BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF
WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec.
1. A new section is added
to chapter 82.14 RCW to read as follows:

(1) A county
legislative authority may submit an authorizing proposition to the county
voters, and if the proposition is approved by a majority of persons voting, fix
and impose a sales and use tax in accordance with the terms of this chapter for
the purposes designated in subsection (3) of this section.

(2) The tax authorized
in this section shall be in addition to any other taxes authorized by law and
shall be collected from those persons who are taxable by the state under
chapters 82.08 and 82.12 RCW upon the occurrence of any taxable event within
the county. The rate of tax shall equal one-tenth of one percent of the
selling price in the case of sales tax, or value of the article used, in the
case of a use tax.

(3) Moneys received
from any tax imposed under this section shall be used solely for the purpose of
providing funds for costs associated with financing, design, acquisition,
construction, equipping, operating, maintaining, remodeling, repairing,
reequipping, and improvement of emergency communication systems and facilities.

(4) Counties are
authorized to develop joint ventures to collocate emergency communication
systems and facilities.

(5) Prior to submitting
the tax authorization in subsection (2) of this section to the voters in a
county that provides emergency communication services to a governmental agency
pursuant to a contract, the parties to the contract shall review and negotiate
or affirm the terms of the contract.

(6) Prior
to submitting the tax authorized in subsection (2) of this section to the
voters, a county with a population of more than five hundred thousand in which
any city over fifty thousand operates emergency communication systems and
facilities shall enter into an interlocal agreement with the city to determine
distribution of the revenue provided in this section.

--- END ---