BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF
WASHINGTON:

_6 NEW SECTION. Sec. 1. The legislature
recognizes that commuting

_7 accounts for more trips and miles traveled than any
other single

_8 purpose. The legislature also recognizes that telework
has been

_9 found to reduce commute trips and provide flexibility
for work-

10 related travel. Additionally, telework enables
employers to allow

11 employees to work outside of urban areas, which reduces
urban

12 commute trips while strengthening rural economies. The
legislature

13 further recognizes that telework is a key component in a

14 comprehensive transportation demand management package.

15 NEW SECTION. Sec. 2. A new section is
added to chapter 82.04

16 RCW to read as follows:

17 (1) A person is allowed a credit against tax due
under this

p. 1 SHB
1478

_1 chapter for telework expenditures, including telework
equipment,

_2 installation costs, and telework training. Total
credits claimed by

_3 a person under this section and section 3 of this act
may not

_4 exceed twenty thousand dollars for any tax year.
Expenditures made

_5 before the effective date of this act are not eligible
for

_6 credit. If a person has used a credit approved under
section 3 of

_7 this act against tax under chapter 82.16 RCW, that same
credit

_8 cannot be used against tax under this chapter.

_9 (2) Application for credits under this section must
be made

10 before making a telework expenditure. Applications must
be made to

11 the department in a form and manner as required by the

12 department. The department shall approve or deny
applications for

13 credits using the criteria under this subsection. The
department

14 shall keep a running total of all credits approved under
this

15 subsection during each calendar year, and shall deny any
credit

16 application that would cause the tabulation for any
calendar year

17 to exceed three million dollars. If a credit is
disallowed because

18 the tabulation of credits approved under this section
would

19 otherwise exceed three million dollars, the disallowed
portion

20 shall be carried over to the next fiscal year. However,
the

21 carryover into the next fiscal year is only permitted to
the

22 extent that the total for the next fiscal year is not
exceeded. The

23 credit may be used against any tax due under this
chapter or

24 chapter 82.16 RCW, and may be carried over until used.
No refunds

25 may be granted for credits under this section. A person
claiming a

26 credit must keep records as necessary for the department
to verify

27 eligibility under this section, including records
showing that an

28 employee was regularly scheduled for telework at his or
her home

29 two or more days per week.

30 (3) The definitions in this subsection apply for the
purposes

31 of this section.

32 (a) "Telework" means a work arrangement
whereby employees are

33 regularly scheduled two or more days per week to perform
the

34 normal duties and responsibilities of their positions at
home,

35 through use of computers or telecommunications. The
term includes

36 only work arrangements made by employers for employees
and

37 excludes persons who are self-employed.

38 (b) "Telework equipment" means:

SHB 1478 p. 2

_1 (i) Desktop and laptop computers, computer-related
hardware,

_2 facsimile machines, modems, and similar data processing
or

_3 telecommunication equipment used only at an employee's
home for

_4 telework purposes; and

_5 (ii) Equipment installed at an employer's place of
business

_6 that is used exclusively to provide remote data and
voice access

_7 to telework employees.

_8 (c) "Telework expenditures" means amounts
spent, including

_9 sales or use taxes paid, to purchase telework equipment,
for

10 training, or for telework installation costs. The term
includes

11 only expenditures for equipment and services reasonably
necessary

12 to facilitate telework.

13 (d) "Telework installation costs" means
one-time expenditures

14 for installation of telecommunication access lines or
other

15 equipment that provides teleworking capability at an
employee's

16 home for the purpose of telework.

17 NEW SECTION. Sec. 3. A new section is
added to chapter 82.16

18 RCW to read as follows:

19 An employer is allowed a credit against tax due
under this

20 chapter for telework expenditures, as defined in section
2 of this

21 act. A credit may be claimed under this section in the
same manner

22 as provided for credits under section 2 of this act. Credits
under

23 this section are subject to the same conditions and
limitations as

24 credits under section 2 of this act.

25 NEW SECTION. Sec. 4. A new section is
added to chapter 82.04

26 RCW to read as follows:

27 A person is eligible for a credit under sections 2
and 3 of

28 this act if the location of the telework is within this
state.

29 NEW SECTION. Sec. 5. A new section is
added to chapter 43.131

30 RCW to read as follows:

31 The telework expenditure credit created by this act
shall be

32 reviewed under this chapter before October 1, 2005. The
department

33 of revenue shall provide the information necessary for
the joint

34 legislative audit and review committee to provide the
required

35 review.

p. 3 SHB
1478

_1

_2 NEW SECTION. Sec. 6. A new section is
added to chapter 43.131

_3 RCW to read as follows:

_4 The following acts or parts of acts, as now existing
or

_5 hereafter amended, are each repealed, effective October
1, 2006:

_6 (1) Section 2 of this act;

_7 (2) Section 3 of this act;

_8 (3) Section 4 of this act.

_9 NEW SECTION. Sec. 7. If any provision of
this act or its

10 application to any person or circumstance is held
invalid, the

11 remainder of the act or the application of the provision
to other

12 persons or circumstances is not affected.

13 NEW SECTION. Sec. 8. This act takes effect
October 1, 2001.

‑‑‑ END ‑‑‑

SHB 1478 p. 4