BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF
WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec.
1. A new section is added
to chapter 70.48 RCW to read as follows:

(1) A city or county
may establish and maintain an alternative detention and rehabilitation facility
for adult persons confined in a holding facility, detention facility, or
special detention facility.

(2) A city or county
must establish an objective classification system to determine those persons
eligible for an alternative detention and rehabilitation facility. The city or
county and its employees are immune from civil liability for damages caused by
individual eligibility decisions, unless the city, county, or its employees acted
with gross negligence or in bad faith.

(3) A city or county
may establish and maintain alternative supervision or rehabilitation programs,
other than those authorized in RCW 70.48.090, within the alternative detention
and rehabilitation facility.

Sec. 2. RCW 70.48.020 and 1987 c
462 s 6 are each amended to read as follows:

As used in this chapter
the words and phrases in this section shall have the meanings indicated unless
the context clearly requires otherwise.

(1) "Holding
facility" means a facility operated by a governing unit primarily
designed, staffed, and used for the temporary housing of adult persons charged
with a criminal offense prior to trial or sentencing and for the temporary
housing of such persons during or after trial and/or sentencing, but in no
instance shall the housing exceed thirty days.

(2) "Detention
facility" means a facility operated by a governing unit primarily
designed, staffed, and used for the temporary housing of adult persons charged
with a criminal offense prior to trial or sentencing and for the housing of
adult persons for purposes of punishment and correction after sentencing or
persons serving terms not to exceed ninety days.

(3) "Special
detention facility" means a minimum security facility operated by a
governing unit primarily designed, staffed, and used for the housing of special
populations of sentenced persons who do not require the level of security
normally provided in detention and correctional facilities including, but not
necessarily limited to, persons convicted of offenses under RCW 46.61.502 or
46.61.504.

(4) "Correctional
facility" means a facility operated by a governing unit primarily
designed, staffed, and used for the housing of adult persons serving terms not
exceeding one year for the purposes of punishment, correction, and
rehabilitation following conviction of a criminal offense.

(5) "Jail"
means any holding, detention, special detention, or correctional facility as
defined in this section.

(6) "Health
care" means preventive, diagnostic, and rehabilitative services provided
by licensed health care professionals and/or facilities; such care to include
providing prescription drugs where indicated.

(7) "Governing
unit" means the city and/or county or any combinations of cities and/or
counties responsible for the operation, supervision, and maintenance of a jail.

(8) "Major
urban" means a county or combination of counties which has a city having a
population greater than twenty-six thousand based on the 1978 projections of
the office of financial management.

(9) "Medium
urban" means a county or combination of counties which has a city having a
population equal to or greater than ten thousand but less than twenty-six
thousand based on the 1978 projections of the office of financial management.

(10) "Rural"
means a county or combination of counties which has a city having a population
less than ten thousand based on the 1978 projections of the office of financial
management.

(11) "Office"
means the office of financial management.

(12)
"Alternative detention and rehabilitation facility" means a facility,
other than those facilities defined in this section, established and staffed by
a county or city for the detention, surveillance, supervision, or
rehabilitation of persons who do not require the level of security normally
provided in holding facilities, detention facilities, or special detention
facilities.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
3. A new section is added
to chapter 82.08 RCW to read as follows:

(1) The tax levied by
RCW 82.08.020 does not apply to sales of:

(a) Items that become
components of an alternative detention and rehabilitation facility as defined
in RCW 70.48.020; or

(b) Labor and services
rendered for constructing, repairing, decorating, or improving an alternative
detention and rehabilitation facility as defined in RCW 70.48.020.

(2) A person taking an
exemption under this section must keep records necessary for the department to
verify eligibility under this section. The exemption is available only when
the buyer provides the seller with an exemption certificate in a form and
manner prescribed by the department. The seller shall retain a copy of the
certificate for the seller's files.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
4. A new section is added
to chapter 82.12 RCW to read as follows:

The provisions of this
chapter do not apply in respect to the use of items that become components of
an alternative detention and rehabilitation facility as defined in RCW
70.48.020. A person taking an exemption under this section must keep records
necessary for the department to verify eligibility under this section.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 5. Sections 3 and 4 of this
act take effect August 1, 2001.

---
END ---