BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF
WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec.
1. The legislature
recognizes that bail bond agents and bail bond recovery agents serve a useful
purpose in the criminal justice system by apprehending and surrendering
fugitives. The legislature also recognizes that locating, apprehending, and
surrendering fugitives require special skills and knowledge, and that bail bond
recovery agents are often required to perform their duties under stressful and
demanding conditions. Therefore, bail bond agencies who use the services of
bail bond recovery agents must be encouraged, in the interest of public safety,
to use bail bond recovery agents who possess the training and experience
necessary for the job.

Sec. 2. RCW 18.185.010 and 2000
c 171 s 40 are each amended to read as follows:

Unless the context
clearly requires otherwise, the definitions in this section apply throughout
this chapter.

(1)
"Department" means the department of licensing.

(2)
"Director" means the director of licensing.

(3) "Collateral or
security" means property of any kind given as security to obtain a bail
bond.

(4) "Bail bond
agency" means a business that sells and issues corporate surety bail bonds
or that provides security in the form of personal or real property to insure the
appearance of a criminal defendant before the courts of this state or the
United States.

(5) "Qualified
agent" means an owner, sole proprietor, partner, manager, officer, or
chief operating officer of a corporation who meets the requirements set forth
in this chapter for obtaining a bail bond agency license.

(6) "Bail bond
agent" means a person who is employed by a bail bond agency and engages in
the sale or issuance of bail bonds, but does not mean a clerical, secretarial,
or other support person who does not participate in the sale or issuance of
bail bonds.

(7)
"Licensee" means a bail bond agency or a bail bond agent or both.

(8) "Branch
office" means any office physically separated from the principal place of
business of the licensee from which the licensee or an employee or agents
conduct any activity meeting the criteria of a bail bond agency.

(9) "Bail bond
recovery agent" means a person who receives compensation or reward for
apprehending and surrendering another person for whom a bail bond has been
posted. "Bail bond recovery agent" does not include bail bond agents
or qualified agents licensed under this chapter or law enforcement officers.

(10)
"Certificate" means the document issued to a bail bond recovery agent
by a bail bond agency or bail bond agent licensed in this state.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
3. A new section is added
to chapter 18.185 RCW to read as follows:

(1) A person may not
perform the duties of a bail bond recovery agent in this state unless he or she:

(a) Is certified by a
bail bond agency or bail bond agent licensed in this state;

(b) Is a bail bond
agent or qualified agent licensed in this state; or

(c) If the person is a
bail bond recovery agent from another state, works under the direct supervision
of a bail bond agent or qualified agent licensed in this state.

(2) Any bail bond
agency or bail bond agent licensed in this state may certify a person to
perform the functions of a bail bond recovery agent. A certificate issued to a
person under this section shall be authority for the person to perform the
functions of a bail bond recovery agent only for the bail bond agency or bail
bond agent issuing the certificate and only for the time period specified on
the certificate. A certified bail bond recovery agent is subject to
supervision by the bail bond agency or bail bond agent issuing the
certification. No certification made by one bail bond agency or bail bond
agent is transferrable to another bail bond agency or bail bond agent.

(3) Before certifying
the bail bond recovery agent, the bail bond agency or bail bond agent shall
verify that the bail bond recovery agent has met the minimum standards
established by the director pursuant to section 4 of this act. The bail bond
agent or bail bond agency may require any information and documentation that
reasonably relates to the need to determine whether the bail bond recovery
agent meets the standards. These standards shall not prevent the certifying
entity from imposing any additional standards or requirements as the certifying
entity considers appropriate. Nothing in this act gives a person who has been
denied a certificate from a bail bond agency or bail bond agent, or whose
certificate has been revoked by a bail bond agency or bail bond agent, any
right to appeal the denial or revocation or any cause of action against the
bail bond agency or bail bond agent or the department.

(4) A bail bond
recovery agent must have the certificate with him or her when apprehending and
surrendering a person. A bail bond recovery agent must exhibit the certificate
upon request.

(5) The bail bond
agency or bail bond agent shall provide the department with a roster of bail
bond recovery agents who the bail bond agency or bail bond agent has certified.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
4. A new section is added
to chapter 18.185 RCW to read as follows:

(1) The director or the
director's designee, with the advice of designees of the bail bond industry,
law enforcement agencies and associations, and prosecutors' associations, shall
adopt rules necessary to administer, implement, and enforce sections 2 through
5 of this act and shall establish minimum standards necessary for a bail bond
agency or qualified agent to certify a bail bond recovery agent.

(2) The standards shall
include, but not be limited to, the following:

(a) A minimum level of
education or experience appropriate for performing the duties of a bail bond
recovery agent;

(b) A minimum level of
instruction in relevant areas of criminal and civil law;

(c) A minimum level of
instruction regarding the appropriate use of force and different degrees of the
use of force;

(d) Adequate training
of the use of firearms from the criminal justice training commission; and

(e) Possession of a
concealed pistol license.

(3) The director or the
director's designee shall develop a format for the certificate required under
section 3 of this act. At a minimum, the certificate must include the
following:

(a) The name, address,
phone number, and license number of the bail bond agency or bail bond agent
certifying the bail bond recovery agent;

(b) The name, address,
and phone number of the bail bond recovery agent;

(c) A statement that
the bail bond agency or bail bond agent attests that the bail bond recovery
agent has met the minimum standards required by the director; and

(d) The length of time
the bail bond recovery agent will be providing services for the bail bond
agency or bail bond agent certifying the bail bond recovery agent.

Sec. 5. RCW 18.185.110 and 1993
c 260 s 12 are each amended to read as follows:

The following acts are
prohibited and constitute grounds for disciplinary action or denial,
suspension, or revocation of any license under this chapter, as deemed
appropriate by the director:

(1) Knowingly violating
any of the provisions of this chapter or the rules adopted under this chapter;

(2) Knowingly making a
material misstatement or omission in the application for or renewal of a
license;

(3) Failing to meet the
qualifications set forth in RCW 18.185.020 and 18.185.030;

(4) Conviction of a
gross misdemeanor or felony or the commission of any act involving moral
turpitude, dishonesty, or corruption whether the act constitutes a crime or
not. If the act constitutes a crime, conviction in a criminal proceeding is
not a condition precedent to disciplinary action. Upon such a conviction, however,
the judgment and sentence is conclusive evidence at the ensuing disciplinary
hearing of the guilt of the license holder or applicant of the crime described
in the indictment or information, and of the person's violation of the statute
on which it is based. For the purposes of this section, conviction includes
all instances in which a plea of guilty or nolo contendere is the basis for the
conviction and all proceedings in which the sentence has been deferred or
suspended. Nothing in this section abrogates rights guaranteed under chapter
9.96A RCW;

(5) Advertising that is
false, fraudulent, or misleading;

(6) Incompetence or
negligence that results in injury to a person or that creates an unreasonable
risk that a person may be harmed;

(7) Suspension,
revocation, or restriction of the individual's license to practice the
profession by competent authority in any state, federal, or foreign
jurisdiction, a certified copy of the order, stipulation, or agreement being
conclusive evidence of the revocation, suspension, or restriction;

(8) Failure to
cooperate with the director by not:

(a) Furnishing any
necessary papers or documents requested by the director for purposes of
conducting an investigation for disciplinary action, denial, suspension, or
revocation of a license under this chapter;

(b) Furnishing in
writing a full and complete explanation covering the matter contained in a
complaint filed with the department; or

(c) Responding to
subpoenas issued by the director, whether or not the recipient of the subpoena
is the accused in the proceeding;

(9) Failure to comply
with an order issued by the director or an assurance of discontinuance entered
into with the director;

(10) Aiding or abetting
an unlicensed person to practice if a license is required;

(11) Knowingly
committing, or being a party to, any material fraud, misrepresentation,
concealment, conspiracy, collusion, trick, scheme, or device whereby any other
person lawfully relies upon the word, representation, or conduct of the licensee;

(12) Failure to
adequately supervise employees to the extent that the client funds are at risk;

(13) Interference with
an investigation or disciplinary proceeding by willful misrepresentation of
facts before the director or the director's authorized representative, or by
the use of threats or harassment against any client or witness to prevent them
from providing evidence in a disciplinary proceeding or any other legal action;

(14) Assigning or
transferring any license issued pursuant to the provisions of this chapter,
except as provided in RCW 18.185.030;

(15) Conversion of any
money or contract, deed, note, mortgage, or other evidence of title, to his or
her own use or to the use of his or her principal or of any other person, when
delivered to him or her in trust or on condition, in violation of the trust or
before the happening of the condition; and failure to return any money or
contract, deed, note, mortgage, or other evidence of title within thirty days
after the owner is entitled to possession, and makes demand for possession,
shall be prima facie evidence of conversion;

(16) Failing to keep
records, maintain a trust account, or return collateral or security, as
required by RCW 18.185.100;

(17) Any conduct in a
bail bond transaction which demonstrates bad faith, dishonesty, or
untrustworthiness; ((or))

(18) Violation of an
order to cease and desist that is issued by the director under this chapter;
or

(19) Using the
services of a bail bond recovery agent without issuing the proper certification
to the bail bond recovery agent or certifying a bail bond recovery agent who
does not meet the minimum standards established by the director under this
chapter. Any costs associated with the department's enforcement pursuant to
this subsection shall be exempt from the fee policy stated in RCW 43.24.086,
and the department shall not use costs associated with enforcement to increase
the fees to bail bond agencies and bail bond agents.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
6. A new section is added
to chapter 18.185 RCW to read as follows:

Any person
who performs the functions of a bail bond recovery agent without first being
certified by a bail bond agency or bail bond agent licensed in this state
commits a gross misdemeanor.

---
END ---