BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF
WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec.
1. A new section is added
to chapter 3.02 RCW to read as follows:

(1) Where approved by
the local legislative body, courts of limited jurisdiction may enter into
agreements with one or more licensed bail bond agencies for the purpose of
executing bench warrants for an accused's failure to appear or violation of a
condition of release. These agreements may specify the scope of work,
remuneration for services, and other charges deemed appropriate.

(2) Upon the release of
an accused on bail or on his or her personal recognizance pending trial, a
court using licensed bail bond agencies shall advise the accused in writing
that his or her failure to appear or violation of the conditions of release
may result in a warrant for the accused's arrest, that the warrant may be
executed by a bail bond agency, and that the accused will be financially
responsible for reimbursement costs to the bail bond agency.

(3) When a warrant is
executed by a licensed bail bond agency, the court shall require the accused to
pay the costs of executing the warrant. Costs shall be limited to actual
expenses incurred by the licensed bail bond agency in seeking, apprehending,
and transporting the accused. Such costs imposed constitute a judgment against
the accused and survive a dismissal or acquittal of the underlying action
against the accused. The court may assign to the licensed bail bond agency any
debt incurred by the accused for the bail bond agency's costs of executing the
warrant.

Sec. 2. RCW 35.20.270 and 1992 c
99 s 1 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) The position of
warrant officer is hereby created and shall be maintained by the city within
the city police department. The number and qualifications of warrant officers
shall be fixed by ordinance, and their compensation shall be paid by the city.

(2) Warrant officers
shall be vested only with the special authority to make arrests authorized by
warrants and other arrests as are authorized by ordinance.

(3) All criminal and
civil process issuing out of courts created under this title shall be directed
to the chief of police of the city served by the court and/or to the sheriff of
the county in which the court is held and/or the warrant officers and be by
them executed according to law in any county of this state.

(4) No process of
courts created under this title shall be executed outside the corporate limits
of the city served by the court unless the person authorized by the process
first contacts the applicable law enforcement agency in whose jurisdiction the
process is to be served.

(5) Upon a defendant
being arrested in another city or county the cost of arresting or serving
process thereon shall be borne by the court issuing the process including the
cost of returning the defendant from any county of the state to the city.

(6) Warrant officers
shall not be entitled to death, disability, or retirement benefits pursuant to
chapter 41.26 RCW on the basis of service as a warrant officer as described in
this section.

(7) Nothing in this
section precludes a court of limited jurisdiction, upon the approval of the
local legislative body, to enter into agreements with licensed bail bond agencies
for the purposes of executing bench warrants for an accused's failure to appear
or violation of a condition of release as provided for in section 1 of this
act.

Sec. 3. RCW 3.62.020 and 1995 c
301 s 31 and 1995 c 291 s 5 are each reenacted and amended to read as follows:

(1) Except as provided
in subsection (4) of this section, all costs, fees, fines, forfeitures and
penalties assessed and collected in whole or in part by district courts, except
costs, fines, forfeitures and penalties assessed and collected, in whole or in
part, because of the violation of city ordinances, shall be remitted by the
clerk of the district court to the county treasurer at least monthly, together
with a financial statement as required by the state auditor, noting the
information necessary for crediting of such funds as required by law.

(2) The county
treasurer shall remit thirty-two percent of the noninterest money received
under subsection (1) of this section except certain costs to the state
treasurer. "Certain costs" as used in this subsection, means those
costs awarded to prevailing parties in civil actions under RCW 4.84.010 or
36.18.040, or those costs awarded against convicted defendants in criminal
actions under RCW 10.01.160, 10.46.190, or 36.18.040, or other similar statutes
if such costs are specifically designated as costs by the court and are awarded
for the specific reimbursement of costs incurred by the state or county in the
prosecution of the case, including the fees of defense counsel. Money remitted
under this subsection to the state treasurer shall be deposited as provided in
RCW 43.08.250.

(3) The balance of the
noninterest money received by the county treasurer under subsection (1) of this
section shall be deposited in the county current expense fund.

(4) All money collected
for county parking infractions shall be remitted by the clerk of the district
court at least monthly, with the information required under subsection (1) of
this section, to the county treasurer for deposit in the county current expense
fund. If the court uses licensed bail bond agencies to execute warrants, as
provided for in section 1 of this act, all money collected for the
reimbursement of bail bond agency expenses shall be remitted by the clerk to
the bail bond agency that incurred such expenses.

(5) Penalties, fines,
bail forfeitures, fees, and costs may accrue interest at the rate of twelve
percent per annum, upon assignment to a collection agency. Interest may accrue
only while the case is in collection status.

(6) Interest retained
by the court on penalties, fines, bail forfeitures, fees, and costs shall be
split twenty-five percent to the state treasurer for deposit in the public
safety and education account as provided in RCW 43.08.250, twenty-five percent
to the state treasurer for deposit in the judicial information system account
as provided in RCW 2.68.020, twenty-five percent to the county current expense
fund, and twenty-five percent to the county current expense fund to fund local
courts.

Sec. 4. RCW 3.62.040 and 1995 c
291 s 6 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) Except as provided
in subsection (4) of this section, all costs, fines, forfeitures and penalties
assessed and collected, in whole or in part, by district courts because of
violations of city ordinances shall be remitted by the clerk of the district
court at least monthly directly to the treasurer of the city wherein the
violation occurred.

(2) The city treasurer
shall remit monthly thirty-two percent of the noninterest money received under
this section, other than for parking infractions and certain costs, to the
state treasurer. "Certain costs" as used in this subsection, means
those costs awarded to prevailing parties in civil actions under RCW 4.84.010
or 36.18.040, or those costs awarded against convicted defendants in criminal
actions under RCW 10.01.160, 10.46.190, or 36.18.040, or other similar statutes
if such costs are specifically designated as costs by the court and are awarded
for the specific reimbursement of costs incurred by the state, county, city, or
town in the prosecution of the case, including the fees of defense counsel.
Money remitted under this subsection to the state treasurer shall be deposited
as provided in RCW 43.08.250.

(3) The balance of the
noninterest money received under this section shall be retained by the city and
deposited as provided by law.

(4) All money collected
for city parking infractions shall be remitted by the clerk of the district
court at least monthly to the city treasurer for deposit in the city's general
fund. If the court uses licensed bail bond agencies to execute warrants, as
provided for in section 1 of this act, all money collected for the
reimbursement of bail bond agency expenses shall be remitted by the clerk to
the bail bond agency that incurred such expenses.

(5) Penalties, fines,
bail forfeitures, fees, and costs may accrue interest at the rate of twelve
percent per annum, upon assignment to a collection agency. Interest may accrue
only while the case is in collection status.

(6)
Interest retained by the court on penalties, fines, bail forfeitures, fees, and
costs shall be split twenty-five percent to the state treasurer for deposit in
the public safety and education account as provided in RCW 43.08.250,
twenty-five percent to the state treasurer for deposit in the judicial
information system account as provided in RCW 2.68.020, twenty-five percent to
the city general fund, and twenty-five percent to the city general fund to fund
local courts.

---
END ---