BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF
WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1. RCW 9.41.047 and 1996 c
295 s 3 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) At the time a
person is convicted or found not guilty by reason of insanity of an
offense making the person ineligible to possess a firearm, or at the time a
person is committed by court order under RCW 71.05.320, 71.34.090, or chapter
10.77 RCW for mental health treatment, the convicting or committing court shall
notify the person, orally and in writing, that the person must immediately
surrender any concealed pistol license and that the person may not possess a
firearm unless his or her right to do so is restored by a court of record. For
purposes of this section a convicting court includes a court in which a person
has been found not guilty by reason of insanity.

The convicting or
committing court also shall forward a copy of the person's driver's license or
identicard, or comparable information, to the department of licensing, along
with the date of conviction or commitment.

(2) Upon receipt of the
information provided for by subsection (1) of this section, the department of
licensing shall determine if the convicted or committed person has a concealed
pistol license. If the person does have a concealed pistol license, the
department of licensing shall immediately notify the license-issuing authority
which, upon receipt of such notification, shall immediately revoke the license.

(3)(a) A person who is
prohibited from possessing a firearm, by reason of having been involuntarily
committed for mental health treatment under RCW 71.05.320, 71.34.090, chapter
10.77 RCW, or equivalent statutes of another jurisdiction may, upon discharge,
petition a court of record to have his or her right to possess a firearm
restored. At the time of commitment, the court shall specifically state to the
person that he or she is barred from possession of firearms.

(b) The secretary of
social and health services shall develop appropriate rules to create an
approval process under this subsection. The rules must provide for the
restoration of the right to possess a firearm upon a showing in a court of
competent jurisdiction that the person is no longer required to participate in
an inpatient or outpatient treatment program, is no longer required to take
medication to treat any condition related to the commitment, and does not
present a substantial danger to himself or herself, others, or the public.
Unlawful possession of a firearm under this subsection shall be punished as a
class C felony under chapter 9A.20 RCW.

(c) A person
petitioning the court under this subsection (3) shall bear the burden of
proving by a preponderance of the evidence that the circumstances resulting in
the commitment no longer exist and are not reasonably likely to recur and by
clear, cogent, and convincing evidence that he or she does not present a
substantial danger to the safety of others.

(4) No person who
has been found not guilty by reason of insanity may petition a court for
restoration of the right to possess a firearm unless the person meets the
requirements for the restoration of the right to possess a firearm that would
have applied under RCW 9.41.040(4) if the person had been found guilty of the
crime.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
2. If any part of this act is
found to be in conflict with federal requirements, the conflicting part of this
act is hereby declared to be inoperative solely to the extent of the conflict,
and such finding or determination does not affect the operation of the
remainder of this act. Rules adopted under this act must meet federal
requirements.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
3. If any provision of this
act or its application to any person or circumstance is held invalid, the
remainder of the act or the application of the provision to other persons or
circumstances is not affected.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 4. This act is necessary for
the immediate preservation of the public peace, health, or safety, or support
of the state government and its existing public institutions, and takes effect
immediately.

---
END ---