BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF
WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1. RCW 9.41.280 and 1999 c
167 s 1 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) It is unlawful for
a person to carry onto, or to possess on, public or private elementary or
secondary school premises, school-provided transportation, or areas of
facilities while being used exclusively by public or private schools:

(a) Any firearm;

(b) Any other dangerous
weapon as defined in RCW 9.41.250;

(c) Any device commonly
known as "nun-chu-ka sticks", consisting of two or more lengths of
wood, metal, plastic, or similar substance connected with wire, rope, or other
means;

(d) Any device,
commonly known as "throwing stars", which are multi-pointed, metal
objects designed to embed upon impact from any aspect; or

(e) Any air gun,
including any air pistol or air rifle, designed to propel a BB, pellet, or
other projectile by the discharge of compressed air, carbon dioxide, or other
gas.

(2)(a) Any ((such))
person violating subsection (1) of this section is guilty of a gross
misdemeanor, except that any student of a public or private school who
violates subsection (1)(a) of this section is guilty of a class C felony.

(b) If any
person is convicted of a violation of subsection (1)(a) of this section, the
person shall have his or her concealed pistol license, if any revoked for a
period of three years. Anyone convicted under this subsection is prohibited
from applying for a concealed pistol license for a period of three years. The
court shall send notice of the revocation to the department of licensing, and
the city, town, or county which issued the license.

(c) Any
violation of subsection (1) of this section by elementary or secondary school
students constitutes grounds for expulsion from the state's public schools in
accordance with RCW 28A.600.010. An appropriate school authority shall
promptly notify law enforcement and the student's parent or guardian regarding
any allegation or indication of such violation.

Upon the arrest of a
person at least twelve years of age and not more than twenty-one years of age
for violating subsection (1)(a) or (f) of this section, the person shall
be detained or confined in a juvenile or adult facility for up to seventy-two
hours. The person shall not be released within the seventy-two hours until
after the person has been examined and evaluated by the county-designated
mental health professional unless the court in its discretion releases the
person sooner after a determination regarding probable cause or on probation
bond or bail.

Within twenty-four
hours of the arrest, the arresting law enforcement agency shall refer the
person to the county-designated mental health professional for examination and
evaluation under chapter 71.05 or 71.34 RCW and inform a parent or guardian of
the person of the arrest, detention, and examination. The county-designated
mental health professional shall examine and evaluate the person subject to the
provisions of chapter 71.05 or 71.34 RCW. The examination shall occur at the
facility in which the person is detained or confined. If the person has been
released on probation, bond, or bail, the examination shall occur wherever is
appropriate.

The county-designated
mental health professional may determine whether to refer the person to the
county-designated chemical dependency specialist for examination and evaluation
in accordance with chapter 70.96A RCW. The county-designated chemical
dependency specialist shall examine the person subject to the provisions of
chapter 70.96A RCW. The examination shall occur at the facility in which the
person is detained or confined. If the person has been released on probation,
bond, or bail, the examination shall occur wherever is appropriate.

Upon completion of any
examination by the county-designated mental health professional or the county-designated
chemical dependency specialist, the results of the examination shall be sent to
the court, and the court shall consider those results in making any
determination about the person.

The county-designated
mental health professional and county-designated chemical dependency specialist
shall, to the extent permitted by law, notify a parent or guardian of the
person that an examination and evaluation has taken place and the results of
the examination. Nothing in this subsection prohibits the delivery of
additional, appropriate mental health examinations to the person while the
person is detained or confined.

If the
county-designated mental health professional determines it is appropriate, the
county-designated mental health professional may refer the person to the local
regional support network for follow-up services or the department of social and
health services or other community providers for other services to the family
and individual.

(3) Subsection (1) of
this section does not apply to:

(a) Any student or
employee of a private military academy when on the property of the academy;

(b) Any person engaged
in military, law enforcement, or school district security activities;

(c) Any person who is
involved in a convention, showing, demonstration, lecture, or firearms safety
course authorized by school authorities in which the firearms of collectors or
instructors are handled or displayed;

(d) Any person while
the person is participating in a firearms or air gun competition approved by
the school or school district;

(e) Any person in
possession of a pistol who has been issued a license under RCW 9.41.070, or is
exempt from the licensing requirement by RCW 9.41.060, while picking up or
dropping off a student;

(f) Any nonstudent at
least eighteen years of age legally in possession of a firearm or dangerous
weapon that is secured within an attended vehicle or concealed from view within
a locked unattended vehicle while conducting legitimate business at the school;

(g) Any nonstudent at
least eighteen years of age who is in lawful possession of an unloaded firearm,
secured in a vehicle while conducting legitimate business at the school; or

(h) Any law enforcement
officer of the federal, state, or local government agency.

(4) Subsections (1)(c)
and (d) of this section do not apply to any person who possesses nun-chu-ka
sticks, throwing stars, or other dangerous weapons to be used in martial arts
classes authorized to be conducted on the school premises.

(5) Except as provided
in subsection (3)(b), (c), (f), and (h) of this section, firearms are not
permitted in a public or private school building.

(6) "GUN-FREE
ZONE" signs shall be posted around school facilities giving warning of the
prohibition of the possession of firearms on school grounds.

(7) If a violation
of subsection (1)(a) of this section occurs and the prosecuting attorney
decides not to file charges, the prosecuting attorney shall issue written
findings supporting the decision and those findings shall be a public record.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
2. A new section is added
to chapter 28A.600 RCW to read as follows:

To improve safety and
security within local schools, a school district board of directors may employ
school security officers, the qualifications and duties of which shall be
determined by the board.

If a district
authorizes school security officers to carry a firearm on school premises, the
district shall enter into an agreement with a local law enforcement agency. The
agreement shall require the local law enforcement agency to maintain a registry
of school security officers hired by the district and to recommend to the
district training activities and qualification guidelines for school security
officers. The agreement shall also provide for the secure storage of the
firearms to be used by the school security officers either at a central school
district facility or at a facility of the law enforcement agency and shall
provide that in either case the firearms shall be stored and maintained in a
manner consistent with the policies of the local law enforcement agency
regarding the storage and maintenance of firearms for its own personnel.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
3. If any part of this act
is found to be in conflict with federal requirements, the conflicting part of
this act is hereby declared to be inoperative solely to the extent of the
conflict, and such finding or determination does not affect the operation of
the remainder of this act. Rules adopted under this act must meet federal
requirements.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
4. If any provision of this act
or its application to any person or circumstance is held invalid, the remainder
of the act or the application of the provision to other persons or
circumstances is not affected.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 5. This act is necessary for
the immediate preservation of the public peace, health, or safety, or support
of the state government and its existing public institutions, and takes effect
immediately.

---
END ---