BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF
WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec.
1. A new section is added
to chapter 84.36 RCW to read as follows:

(1) A taxpayer is
eligible for a credit against the state levy imposed on the taxpayer's
owner-occupied residence, if the following conditions are met:

(a) The taxpayer must
be sixty-four years of age or older on December 31st of the year in which a
credit claim is filed; and

(b) The taxpayer and
the residence must meet all the conditions of RCW 84.36.381 (1) and (2).

(2) The amount of
credit is equal to a percentage of the state levy imposed on the residence,
based on the taxpayer's age on December 31st of the year before the taxes are
due, as determined under the following table.

AGE CREDIT

64 15%

65 20%

66 25%

67 30%

68 40%

69 50%

Sec. 2. RCW 84.36.385 and 1992 c
206 s 13 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) A claim for
exemption under RCW 84.36.381 ((as now or hereafter amended,)) or a
credit under section 1 of this act shall be made and filed at any time
during the year for exemption or credit from taxes payable the following
year and thereafter and solely upon forms as prescribed and furnished by the
department of revenue. However, an exemption from tax under RCW 84.36.381 or
a credit under section 1 of this act shall continue for no more than four
years unless a renewal application is filed as provided in subsection (3) of
this section. The county assessor may also require, by written notice, a
renewal application following an amendment of the income requirements set forth
in RCW 84.36.381. Renewal applications shall be on forms prescribed and
furnished by the department of revenue.

(2) A person granted an
exemption under RCW 84.36.381 or a credit under section 1 of this act
shall inform the county assessor of any change in status affecting ((the
person's)) entitlement to the exemption or credit on forms
prescribed and furnished by the department of revenue.

(3) Each person exempt
from taxes under RCW 84.36.381 in 1993 and thereafter, shall file with the
county assessor a renewal application not later than December 31 of the year
the assessor notifies such person of the requirement to file the renewal
application.

(4) Beginning in 1992
and in each of the three succeeding years, the county assessor shall notify
approximately one-fourth of those persons exempt from taxes under RCW 84.36.381
in the current year who have not filed a renewal application within the
previous four years, of the requirement to file a renewal application.

(5) If the assessor
finds that the applicant does not meet the qualifications as set forth in RCW
84.36.381((, as now or hereafter amended)) or section 1 of this act,
the claim or exemption shall be denied but such denial shall be subject to appeal
under the provisions of RCW 84.48.010(5). If the applicant had received
exemption or credit in prior years based on erroneous information, the
taxes shall be collected subject to penalties as provided in RCW 84.40.130 for
a period of not to exceed three years.

(6) The department and
each local assessor is hereby directed to publicize the qualifications and
manner of making claims under RCW 84.36.381 through 84.36.389 and section 1
of this act, through communications media, including such paid advertisements
or notices as it deems appropriate. Notice of the qualifications, method of
making applications, the penalties for not reporting a change in status, and
availability of further information shall be included on or with property tax
statements and revaluation notices for all residential property including
mobile homes, except rental properties.

Sec. 3. RCW 84.36.387 and 1992 c
206 s 14 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) All claims for
exemption under RCW 84.36.381 or a credit under section 1 of this act
shall be made and signed by the person entitled to the exemption or credit,
by his or her attorney in fact or in the event the residence of such person is
under mortgage or purchase contract requiring accumulation of reserves out of
which the holder of the mortgage or contract is required to pay real estate
taxes, by such holder or by the owner, either before two witnesses or the
county assessor or ((his)) the assessor's deputy in the county
where the real property is located: PROVIDED, That if a claim for exemption or
credit is made by a person living in a cooperative housing association,
corporation, or partnership, such claim shall be made and signed by the person
entitled to the exemption or credit and by the authorized agent of such
cooperative.

(2) If the taxpayer is
unable to submit his or her own claim, the claim shall be submitted by a
duly authorized agent or by a guardian or other person charged with the care of
the person or property of such taxpayer.

(3) All claims for
exemption and renewal applications under RCW 84.36.381 shall be
accompanied by such documented verification of income as shall be prescribed by
rule adopted by the department of revenue.

(4) Any person signing
a false claim with the intent to defraud or evade the payment of any tax shall
be guilty of the offense of perjury.

(5) The tax liability
of a cooperative housing association, corporation, or partnership shall be
reduced by the amount of tax exemption or credit to which a claimant
residing therein is entitled and such cooperative shall reduce any amount owed
by the claimant to the cooperative by such exact amount of tax exemption or
credit or, if no amount be owed, the cooperative shall make payment to the
claimant of such exact amount of exemption or credit.

(6) A remainderman or
other person who would have otherwise paid the tax on real property that is the
subject of an exemption granted under RCW 84.36.381 or a credit granted
under section 1 of this act for an estate for life shall reduce the amount
which would have been payable by the life tenant to the remainderman or other
person to the extent of the exemption or credit. If no amount is owed
or separately stated as an obligation between these persons, the remainderman
or other person shall make payment to the life tenant in the exact amount of
the exemption or credit.

Sec. 4. RCW 84.36.389 and 1979
ex.s. c 214 s 4 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) The director of the
department of revenue shall adopt such rules ((and regulations)) and
prescribe such forms as may be necessary and appropriate for implementation and
administration of this chapter subject to chapter 34.05 RCW, the administrative
procedure act.

(2) The department may
conduct such audits of the administration of RCW 84.36.381 through 84.36.389 and
section 1 of this act and the claims for exemption or credit filed
thereunder as it considers necessary. The powers of the department under
chapter 84.08 RCW apply to these audits.

(3) Any information or
facts concerning confidential income data obtained by the assessor or the
department, or their agents or employees, under subsection (2) of this section
shall be used only to administer RCW 84.36.381 through 84.36.389. Notwithstanding
any provision of law to the contrary, absent written consent by the person
about whom the information or facts have been obtained, the confidential income
data shall not be disclosed by the assessor or the assessor's agents or
employees to anyone other than the department or the department's agents or
employees nor by the department or the department's agents or employees to
anyone other than the assessor or the assessor's agents or employees except in
a judicial proceeding pertaining to the taxpayer's entitlement to the tax
exemption under RCW 84.36.381 through 84.36.389. Any violation of this
subsection is a misdemeanor.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 5. Section 1 of this act
applies to taxes levied for collection in 2002 and thereafter.

---
END ---