BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF
WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1. RCW 84.55.0101 and 1997
c 3 s 204 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) Upon a
finding of substantial need, the legislative authority of a taxing district
other than the state may provide for the use of a limit factor under this
chapter of one hundred six percent or less. A limit factor may be adopted
for a period not to exceed nine consecutive years. After the expiration of a
period for which a limit factor is adopted, another limit factor may not be
adopted for an equal number of years.

(2) In districts
with legislative authorities of four members or less, two-thirds of the members
must approve an ordinance or resolution under this section. In districts with
more than four members, a majority plus one vote must approve an ordinance or
resolution under this section. The new limit factor shall be effective for
taxes collected in the following year only. Subsequent levies shall be
computed as if the taxing district had levied for that year at the maximum rate
that would otherwise have been allowed under this chapter without a finding of
substantial need.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
2. Section 1 of this act
takes effect on the day a decision of a court in this state becomes final and
invalidates, in whole or in part, the application of section 6, chapter 2, Laws
of 2001 (Initiative Measure No. 722) to property tax levies.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 3. Section 1 of this act
applies to taxes levied for collection in 2002 and thereafter.

---
END ---