BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF
WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec.
1. A new section is added
to chapter 84.38 RCW to read as follows:

The legislature finds
that large and unanticipated increases in taxes on residential property,
usually attributable to rapid increases in property values, cause undue and
excessive hardships for many homeowners. These increased tax burdens put many
of these homeowners at risk of being unable to remain in their residences and
maintain their property. Temporary financial hardships, such as unemployment
or medical costs, may also cause some homeowners to have insufficient resources
to pay property tax bills. The deferral program created in section 2 of this
act is intended to provide those distressed taxpayers with the ability to defer
taxes due so that they will be able to remain in their homes while still paying
an equitable share of the overall property tax burden.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
2. A new section is added
to chapter 84.38 RCW to read as follows:

(1) A claimant may
defer payment of that amount of real property taxes that exceeds six percent of
the claimant's combined disposable income, but not to exceed two thousand five
hundred dollars per year. (2) Deferral of taxes under this chapter is subject
to the following conditions:

(a) The claimant must
have owned, at the time of filing, the residence on which the real property
taxes have been imposed. For purposes of this subsection, a residence owned by
a marital community or owned by cotenants shall be deemed to be owned by each
spouse or cotenant. A claimant who has only a share ownership in cooperative
housing, a life estate, a lease for life, or a revocable trust does not satisfy
the ownership requirement.

(b) The property taxes
must have been imposed upon a residence that was occupied by the claimant as a
principal place of residence.

(c) A deferral is not
allowed for taxes levied in the first full calendar year in which the person
owns the residence.

(d) The claimant must
have and keep in force fire and casualty insurance in sufficient amount to
protect the interest of the state in the claimant's equity value. If the
claimant fails to keep fire and casualty insurance in force to the extent of
the state's interest in the claimant's equity value, the amount deferred shall
not exceed one hundred percent of the claimant's equity value in the land or
lot only.

(e) The total amount of
taxes deferred, including interest thereon, must not exceed eighty percent of
the claimant's equity value in the residence.

Sec. 3. RCW 84.38.010 and 1975
1st ex.s. c 291 s 26 are each amended to read as follows:

The legislature
finds that savings once deemed adequate for retirement living have been
rendered inadequate by increased tax rates, increased property values, and the
failure of pension systems to adequately reflect such factors. It is therefore
deemed necessary that the legislature, in addition to that tax exemption as
provided for in RCW 84.36.381 through 84.36.389 as now or hereafter amended,
allow retired persons to defer payment of special assessments on their
residences, and to defer their real property tax obligations on their
residences, an amount of up to eighty percent of their equity in said
property. ((This deferral program)) The deferral provided under RCW
84.38.030 is intended to assist retired persons in maintaining their
dignity and a reasonable standard of living by residing in their own homes,
providing for their own needs, and managing their own affairs without requiring
assistance from public welfare programs.

Sec. 4. RCW 84.38.050 and 1979
ex.s. c 214 s 8 are each amended to read as follows:

(1)(a) Declarations to
defer property taxes for all years following the first year under RCW
84.38.030 may be made by filing with the county assessor no later than
thirty days before the tax is due a renewal form in duplicate, prescribed by
the department of revenue and supplied by the county assessor, which affirms
the continued eligibility of the claimant.

(b) In January of each
year, the county assessor shall send to each claimant who has been granted
deferral of ad valorem taxes for the previous year under RCW 84.38.030
renewal forms and notice to renew.

(2) Declarations to
defer special assessments shall be made by filing with the assessor no later
than thirty days before the special assessment is due on a form to be
prescribed by the department of revenue and supplied by the county assessor.
Upon approval, the full amount of special assessments upon such claimant's
residence shall be deferred but not to exceed an amount equal to eighty percent
of the claimant's equity value in said property.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 5. This act is effective for
taxes levied for collection in 2002 and thereafter.

---
END ---