BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF
WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1. RCW 84.55.005 and 1997 c
393 s 20 and 1997 c 3 s 201 are each reenacted and amended to read as follows:

As used in this
chapter:

(1)
"Inflation" means the percentage change in the implicit price
deflator for personal consumption expenditures for the United States as
published for the most recent twelve-month period by the bureau of economic
analysis of the federal department of commerce in September of the year before
the taxes are payable;

(2) "Limit
factor" means:

(a) For taxing
districts with a population of less than ten thousand in the calendar year
prior to the assessment year, one hundred six percent;

(b) For taxing
districts for which a limit factor is authorized under RCW 84.55.0101, the
lesser of the limit factor authorized under that section or one hundred six
percent;

(c) For the state,
the lesser of one hundred two percent or one hundred percent plus inflation;

(d) For all
other districts, the lesser of one hundred six percent or one hundred percent
plus inflation; and

(3) "Regular
property taxes" has the meaning given it in RCW 84.04.140.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 2. Section 1 of this act
takes effect on the day a decision of a court in this state becomes final and
invalidates, in whole or in part, the application of section 5, chapter 2, Laws
of 2001 (Initiative Measure No. 722) to the state property tax levy.

---
END ---