BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF
WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec.
1. A new section is added to
chapter 84.38 RCW to read as follows:

The legislature finds
that it has become increasingly difficult for many homeowners to pay the
increased taxes resulting from rapid increases in valuation. The legislature
intends to allow low-income homeowners to defer payment of property taxes on
their principal residences to the extent that tax increases exceed fifteen
percent. The deferral program created in section 2 of this act is intended to
assist persons in maintaining their homes by easing the increases in tax.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
2. A new section is added
to chapter 84.38 RCW to read as follows:

(1) A claimant may
defer that portion of the increase in real property taxes on the claimant's
principal residence that exceeds fifteen percent of the taxes due the previous
year. In determining the amount of taxes that are eligible for deferral under
this chapter, any increase in tax due to physical improvements made to the
property since the previous assessment shall not be considered in the year in
which improvements are made.

(2) Deferral of taxes
under this chapter is subject to the following conditions:

(a) The claimant must
have owned, at the time of filing, the residence on which the real property
taxes have been imposed. For purposes of this subsection, a residence owned by
a marital community or owned by cotenants shall be deemed to be owned by each
spouse or cotenant. A claimant who has only a share ownership in cooperative
housing, a life estate, a lease for life, or a revocable trust does not satisfy
the ownership requirement.

(b) The property taxes
must have been imposed upon a residence that was occupied by the claimant as a
principal place of residence.

(c) The claimant must
have a combined disposable income, as defined in RCW 84.36.383, less than the
median household income as estimated for the previous year by the office of
financial management for the county where the residence is located.

(d) A deferral is not
allowed for taxes levied in the first full calendar year in which the person
owns the residence.

(e) The claimant must
have and keep in force fire and casualty insurance in sufficient amount to
protect the interest of the state in the claimant's equity value. If the
claimant fails to keep fire and casualty insurance in force to the extent of
the state's interest in the claimant's equity value, the amount deferred shall
not exceed one hundred percent of the claimant's equity value in the land or
lot only.

(f) The total amount of
taxes deferred, including interest thereon, must not exceed eighty percent of
the claimant's equity value in the residence.

Sec. 3. RCW 84.38.010 and 1975
1st ex.s. c 291 s 26 are each amended to read as follows:

The legislature
finds that savings once deemed adequate for retirement living have been
rendered inadequate by increased tax rates, increased property values, and the
failure of pension systems to adequately reflect such factors. It is therefore
deemed necessary that the legislature, in addition to that tax exemption as
provided for in RCW 84.36.381 through 84.36.389 as now or hereafter amended,
allow retired persons to defer payment of special assessments on their
residences, and to defer their real property tax obligations on their
residences, an amount of up to eighty percent of their equity in said
property. ((This deferral program)) The deferral provided under RCW
84.38.030 is intended to assist retired persons in maintaining their
dignity and a reasonable standard of living by residing in their own homes,
providing for their own needs, and managing their own affairs without requiring
assistance from public welfare programs.

Sec. 4. RCW 84.38.050 and 1979
ex.s. c 214 s 8 are each amended to read as follows:

(1)(a) Declarations to
defer property taxes for all years following the first year under RCW
84.38.030 may be made by filing with the county assessor no later than
thirty days before the tax is due a renewal form in duplicate, prescribed by
the department of revenue and supplied by the county assessor, which affirms
the continued eligibility of the claimant.

(b) In January of each
year, the county assessor shall send to each claimant who has been granted
deferral of ad valorem taxes for the previous year under RCW 84.38.030
renewal forms and notice to renew.

(2) Declarations to
defer special assessments shall be made by filing with the assessor no later
than thirty days before the special assessment is due on a form to be
prescribed by the department of revenue and supplied by the county assessor.
Upon approval, the full amount of special assessments upon such claimant's
residence shall be deferred but not to exceed an amount equal to eighty percent
of the claimant's equity value in said property.

NEW SECTION.
Sec. 5. This act is effective for
taxes levied for collection in 2002 and thereafter.

---
END ---