BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

_7 NEW SECTION. Sec. 1. A new section is
added to chapter 71.09

_8 RCW to read as follows:

_9 (1) A less restrictive alternative ordered after
January 1,

10 2001, may not be located in any community unless the
legislative

11 authority of the city, town, or county with land use
planning

12 authority for the site has first approved such location.

13 (2) The department shall make every effort to ensure
that less

14 restrictive alternative small housing units are allocated

15 equitably among the counties, taking into account the
burden

16 already placed on each county as a result of:

17 (a) The number of sex offenders registered in such
county;

18 (b) The number of total offenders under community
supervision

p. 1 HB
1495

_1 residing in such county; and

_2 (c) Other less restrictive alternative small housing
units

_3 already located or planned to be located in such county.

_4 Sec. 2. RCW
71.09.020 and 1995 c 216 s 1 are each amended to read

_5 as follows:

_6 Unless the context clearly requires otherwise, the
definitions

_7 in this section apply throughout this chapter.

_8 (1) "Sexually violent predator" means any
person who has been

_9 convicted of or charged with a crime of sexual violence
and who

10 suffers from a mental abnormality or personality
disorder which

11 makes the person likely to engage in predatory acts of
sexual

12 violence if not confined in a secure facility.

13 (2) "Mental abnormality" means a
congenital or acquired

14 condition affecting the emotional or volitional capacity
which

15 predisposes the person to the commission of criminal
sexual acts

16 in a degree constituting such person a menace to the
health and

17 safety of others.

18 (3) "Likely to engage in predatory acts of
sexual violence"

19 means that the person more probably than not will engage
in such

20 acts. Such likelihood must be evidenced by a recent
overt act if

21 the person is not totally confined at the time the
petition is

22 filed under RCW 71.09.030.

23 (4) "Predatory" means acts directed
towards strangers or

24 individuals with whom a relationship has been
established or

25 promoted for the primary purpose of victimization.

26 (5) "Recent overt act" means any act that
has either caused

27 harm of a sexually violent nature or creates a
reasonable

28 apprehension of such harm.

29 (6) "Sexually violent offense" means an
act committed on,

30 before, or after July 1, 1990, that is: (a) An act
defined in Title

31 9A RCW as rape in the first degree, rape in the second
degree by

32 forcible compulsion, rape of a child in the first or
second

33 degree, statutory rape in the first or second degree,
indecent

34 liberties by forcible compulsion, indecent liberties
against a

35 child under age fourteen, incest against a child under
age

36 fourteen, or child molestation in the first or second
degree; (b)

37 a felony offense in effect at any time prior to July 1,
1990, that

HB 1495 p. 2

_1 is comparable to a sexually violent offense as defined
in (a) of

_2 this subsection, or any federal or out-of-state
conviction for a

_3 felony offense that under the laws of this state would
be a

_4 sexually violent offense as defined in this subsection;
(c) an act

_5 of murder in the first or second degree, assault in the
first or

_6 second degree, assault of a child in the first or second
degree,

_7 kidnapping in the first or second degree, burglary in
the first

_8 degree, residential burglary, or unlawful imprisonment,
which act,

_9 either at the time of sentencing for the offense or
subsequently

10 during civil commitment proceedings pursuant to chapter
71.09 RCW,

11 has been determined beyond a reasonable doubt to have
been

12 sexually motivated, as that term is defined in RCW
9.94A.030; or

13 (d) an act as described in chapter 9A.28 RCW, that is an
attempt,

14 criminal solicitation, or criminal conspiracy to commit
one of the

15 felonies designated in (a), (b), or (c) of this
subsection.

16 (7) "Less restrictive alternative" means
court-ordered

17 treatment in a setting less restrictive than total
confinement.

18 (8) "Less restrictive alternative small
housing unit" means a

19 facility owned and operated by the department of
social and health

20 services, or operated under contract with the
department of social

21 and health services, for the purpose of housing no
more than three

22 persons at one time who have been ordered
conditionally released

23 to a less restrictive alternative.

24 (9) "Secretary" means the secretary
of social and health

25 services or his or her designee.

26 (10) "Department" means the department
of social and health

27 services.

28 NEW SECTION. Sec. 3. A new section is
added to chapter 71.09

29 RCW to read as follows:

30 A less restrictive alternative small housing unit
shall meet

31 the following minimum requirements:

32 (1) The location of the housing unit shall enable:

33 (a) An average response time of five minutes or less
by law

34 enforcement, or publicly employed staff, other than
residential

35 staff of the housing unit, who are qualified and
designated to

36 perform security response functions relative to the
housing unit;

37 and

p. 3 HB
1495

_1 (b) An average response time by fire safety and
emergency

_2 medical personnel that is no longer than the average of
the local

_3 community.

_4 (2) The property where the housing unit is located
may not be

_5 within line of sight of, adjacent to, or in direct
proximity with

_6 any of the following:

_7 (a) Schools, including public schools, full-time
private

_8 schools serving any of the grades K-12, and public or
private

_9 institutions of higher education;

10 (b) School bus stops;

11 (c) Preschools, including Headstart and ECEAP;

12 (d) Licensed child care homes and centers;

13 (e) Parks and publicly dedicated trails;

14 (f) Sports fields, playgrounds, and recreational and
community

15 centers;

16 (g) Places of worship, including churches, mosques,
synagogues,

17 and temples.

18 (3) The housing unit shall contain at least the
following

19 security devices:

20 (a) An installed household security or alarm system
that alerts

21 staff to any unauthorized movements into or outside of
the housing

22 unit, and that features a main control panel with a
power supply,

23 battery backup, and tamperproof switch;

24 (b) An interior siren for security and fire;

25 (c) Cellular phone services with clear and
uninterrupted

26 services; and

27 (d) Alarm-activated listening devices and camera
systems.

28 (4) The housing unit shall be located in an area
where a

29 contractor is available to install, monitor, and repair
the

30 security devices specified in subsection (3) of this
section.

31 (5) The housing unit shall be located within an
approximate

32 one‑hour one-way commute to a city or town with a
population of

33 twenty-five thousand or more.

34 (6) The housing unit shall be located in an area in
which

35 qualified treatment providers are available.

36 (7) Residents of the housing unit shall wear
electronic

37 monitoring devices at all times.

38 (8) Whenever a resident of the housing unit is
present on the

HB 1495 p. 4

_1 premises, the housing unit shall maintain a staffing
ratio of one

_2 staff person for each resident during the morning,
afternoon, and

_3 evening hours when residents are typically awake, and
two staff

_4 persons on duty during night hours when residents are
typically

_5 asleep.

_6 (9) A resident shall be escorted by staff of the
housing unit

_7 or other court-authorized persons when leaving the
premises of the

_8 housing unit. The escort shall remain in close
proximity to the

_9 resident and maintain close supervision of the resident
at all

10 times.

11 (10) Staff of a housing unit must meet the
qualifications of

12 state job classes "residential rehabilitation counselor
I, II, or

13 III" as defined by the department, if the housing
unit is operated

14 directly by the department or, if the housing unit is
operated

15 under contract with the department, similar
qualifications as

16 required by the contract.

17 (11) Each staff person shall complete a
department-approved

18 training curriculum, including new employee orientation
and

19 training regarding program and treatment requirements,
prior to

20 beginning work in a housing unit.

21 (12) Each staff person shall participate in ongoing
inservice

22 training programs provided by the department for housing
unit

23 staff.

24 NEW SECTION. Sec. 4. A new section is
added to chapter 71.09

25 RCW to read as follows:

26 (1) The department may establish or relocate a less
restrictive

27 alternative small housing unit only after meeting the
public

28 notification and review requirements of this section.

29 (2) When the department has selected three or fewer
sites for

30 final consideration for the location or relocation of a
less

31 restrictive alternative small housing unit, the
department shall

32 make public notification and conduct at least two public
hearings

33 in each of the local communities where such a housing
unit may be

34 sited.

35 (3) The public hearings required under subsection
(2) of this

36 section shall be conducted not less than sixty days
before a final

37 selection is made.

p. 5 HB
1495

_1 (4) To provide adequate notice of, and opportunity
for

_2 interested persons to comment on, a proposed location,
the

_3 department shall provide a minimum of fourteen days'
advance

_4 notice of the public hearings to at least the following:

_5 (a) All newspapers of general circulation in the
community and

_6 all radio and television stations generally available to
persons

_7 in the community where the potential site is located;

_8 (b) Appropriate school districts, private schools,

_9 kindergartens, institutions of higher education, city
and county

10 libraries, and all other local government offices within
a one-

11 half mile radius of each proposed site;

12 (c) The local chamber of commerce, local economic
development

13 agencies, and any other local organizations that request
such

14 notification from the department; and

15 (d) All residents and property owners within a
one-half mile

16 radius of the proposed site or sites, with such
notification to be

17 in writing.

18 NEW SECTION. Sec. 5. A new section is
added to chapter 71.09

19 RCW to read as follows:

20 The department may establish a less restrictive
alternative

21 housing facility housing more than three residents at
one time

22 only after receiving legislative approval of
department-proposed

23 criteria for the siting, securing, programming, and
staffing of

24 such a facility.

25 NEW SECTION. Sec. 6. A new section is
added to chapter 18.155

26 RCW to read as follows:

27 The department shall revoke the sex offender
treatment

28 certification of any treatment provider who
intentionally,

29 knowingly, recklessly, or with gross negligence violates
the

30 requirements of RCW 71.09.092 or 71.09.096 pertaining to
treatment

31 providers.

32 NEW SECTION. Sec. 7. This act is necessary
for the immediate

33 preservation of the public peace, health, or safety, or
support of

34 the state government and its existing public
institutions, and

35 takes effect immediately.

HB 1495 p. 6

_1 NEW SECTION. Sec. 8. This act is intended
to be remedial and

_2 procedural and should be construed to apply
retroactively to any

_3 less restrictive alternative at any facility not in
operation as

_4 of January 1, 2001.

‑‑‑ END ‑‑‑

p. 7 HB
1495