BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF
WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec.
1. (1) The legislative
authority of any town or city located in a county with a population of less
than one million may create a public centers district. The legislative
authorities of any contiguous group of towns or cities located in a county or
counties each with a population of less than one million may enter an agreement
under chapter 39.34 RCW for the creation and joint operation of a public
centers district.

(2) A public centers
district shall be coextensive with the boundaries of the city or town or
contiguous group of cities or towns that created the district.

(3)(a) A public centers
district created by a single city or town shall be governed by a board of
directors consisting of five members selected as follows: (i) Two members who
are appointed by the legislative authority of the city or town and are not
members of the legislative authority of the city or town; and (ii) three
members appointed by the legislative authority based on recommendations from
local organizations, which may include but are not limited to the local chamber
of commerce, local economic development council, and local labor council. The
members shall serve four-year terms. Of the initial members, one must be
appointed for a one-year term, one must be appointed for a two-year term, one
must be appointed for a three-year term, and the remainder must be appointed
for four-year terms.

(b) A public centers
district created by a contiguous group of cities and towns shall be governed by
a board of directors consisting of seven members selected as follows: (i)
Three members who are appointed by the legislative authorities of the cities
and towns and are not members of the legislative authorities of the cities and
towns; and (ii) four members appointed by the legislative authority based on
recommendations from local organizations, which include but are not limited to
the local chamber of commerce, local economic development council, local labor
council, and neighborhood organizations that are directly affected by the location
of the centers in their area. The members of the board of directors shall be
appointed in accordance with the terms of the agreement under chapter 39.34 RCW
for the joint operation of the district and shall serve four-year terms. Of
the initial members, one must be appointed for a one-year term, one must be
appointed for a two-year term, one must be appointed for a three-year term, and
the remainder must be appointed for four-year terms.

(4) A public centers
district is a municipal corporation, an independent taxing
"authority" within the meaning of Article VII, section 1 of the state
Constitution, and a "taxing district" within the meaning of Article
VII, section 2 of the state Constitution.

(5) A public centers
district constitutes a body corporate and possesses all the usual powers of a
corporation for public purposes as well as all other powers that may now or
hereafter be specifically conferred by statute, including, but not limited to,
the authority to hire employees, staff, and services, to enter into contracts,
and to sue and be sued.

(6) A public centers
district may acquire and transfer real and personal property by lease,
sublease, purchase, or sale. No direct or collateral attack on any public
centers district purported to be authorized or created in conformance with this
chapter may be commenced more than thirty days after creation by the city
legislative authority.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
2. (1) A public centers
district is authorized to acquire, construct, own, remodel, maintain, equip,
reequip, repair, finance, and operate one or more public centers. For purposes
of this chapter, "public center" means a convention, conference, or
special events, cultural, technology, or community center, or any combination
of facilities, and related parking facilities, constructed, improved, or
rehabilitated after July 1, 2001. "Public center" also includes an
existing convention, conference, special events, cultural, technology, or
community center, and related parking facilities, that is improved or
rehabilitated after July 1, 2001.

(2) A public centers
district may impose charges and fees for the use of its facilities and may
accept and expend or use gifts, grants, and donations for the purpose of a
public center.

(3) A public centers
district may impose charges, fees, and taxes authorized in section 4 of this
act and use revenues derived therefrom for the purpose of paying principal and
interest payments on bonds issued by the public centers district to construct a
public center.

(4) Notwithstanding the
establishment of a career, civil, or merit service system, a public centers
district may contract with a public or private entity for the operation or
management of its public centers.

(5) A public centers
district is authorized to use the supplemental alternative public works
contracting procedures set forth in chapter 39.10 RCW in connection with the
design, construction, reconstruction, remodel, or alteration of any public
center.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
3. (1) To carry out the
purpose of this chapter, a public centers district may issue general obligation
bonds, not to exceed an amount, together with any outstanding nonvoter-approved
general obligation indebtedness, equal to one-half of one percent of the value
of the taxable property within the district, as the term "value of the
taxable property" is defined in RCW 39.36.015. A public centers district
additionally may issue general obligation bonds for capital purposes only,
together with any outstanding general obligation indebtedness, not to exceed an
amount equal to one and one-fourth percent of the value of the taxable property
within the district, as the term "value of the taxable property" is
defined in RCW 39.36.015, when authorized by the voters of the public centers
district pursuant to Article VIII, section 6 of the state Constitution, and to
provide for the retirement thereof by taxes authorized in this act.

(2) General obligation
bonds may be issued with a maturity of up to thirty years and must be issued
and sold in accordance with the provisions of chapter 39.46 RCW.

(3) The general
obligation bonds may be payable from the operating revenues of the public centers
district in addition to the tax receipts of the district.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
4. (1) The board of
directors of the public centers district may impose the following for the
purpose of funding a public center:

(a) Charges and fees
for the use of any of its facilities;

(b) Admission charges
under RCW 35.57.100;

(c) Vehicle parking
charges under RCW 35.57.110; and

(d) Sales and use taxes
authorized under sections 12 and 13 of this act.

(2) The board may
accept and expend or use gifts, grants, and donations for the purpose of a
public center. The revenue from the charges, fees, and taxes imposed under
this section shall be used only for the purposes authorized by this chapter.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
5. The board of directors of
the public centers district shall adopt a resolution that may be amended from
time to time that establishes the basic requirements governing methods and
amounts of reimbursement payable to such district officials and employees for
travel and other business expenses incurred on behalf of the district. The
resolution must, among other things, establish procedures for approving such
expenses; the form of the travel and expense voucher; and requirements
governing the use of credit cards issued in the name of the district. The
resolution may also establish procedures for payment of per diem to board
members. The state auditor shall, as provided by general law, cooperate with
the public centers district in establishing adequate procedures for regulating
and auditing the reimbursement of all such expenses.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
6. The board of directors of
the public centers district has the authority to authorize the expenditure of
funds for the public purposes of preparing and distributing information to the
general public and promoting, advertising, improving, developing, operating,
and maintaining a public center. Nothing contained in this section may be
construed to authorize preparation and distribution of information to the
general public for the purpose of influencing the outcome of a district
election.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
7. The public centers
district may secure services by means of an agreement with a service provider.
The public centers district shall publish notice, establish criteria, receive
and evaluate proposals, and negotiate with respondents under requirements set
forth by district resolution.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
8. In addition to provisions
contained in chapter 39.04 RCW, the public centers district is authorized to
follow procedures contained in RCW 43.19.1906 and 43.19.1911 for all purchases,
contracts for purchase, and sales.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
9. (1) A public centers
district may issue revenue bonds to fund revenue-generating facilities, or
portions of facilities, which it is authorized to provide or operate. Whenever
revenue bonds are to be issued, the board of directors of the district shall create
or have created a special fund or funds from which, along with any reserves
created pursuant to RCW 39.44.140, the principal and interest on such revenue
bonds shall exclusively be payable. The board may obligate the district to set
aside and pay into the special fund or funds a fixed proportion or a fixed
amount of the revenues from the public improvements, projects, or centers, and
all related additions, that are funded by the revenue bonds. This amount or
proportion shall be a lien and charge against these revenues, subject only to
operating and maintenance expenses. The board shall have due regard for the
cost of operation and maintenance of the public improvements, projects, or
centers, or additions, that are funded by the revenue bonds, and shall not set
aside into the special fund or funds a greater amount or proportion of the
revenues that in its judgment will be available over and above the cost of
maintenance and operation and the amount or proportion, if any, of the revenue
so previously pledged. The board may also provide that revenue bonds payable
out of the same source or sources of revenue may later be issued on a parity
with any revenue bonds being issued and sold.

(2) Revenue bonds
issued under this section shall not be an indebtedness of the district issuing
the bonds, and the interest and principal on the bonds shall only be payable
from the revenues lawfully pledged to meet the principal and interest
requirements and any reserves created under RCW 39.44.140. The owner or bearer
of a revenue bond or any interest coupon issued under this section shall not
have any claim against the district arising from the bond or coupon except for
payment from the revenues lawfully pledged to meet the principal and interest
requirements and any reserves created under RCW 39.44.140. The substance of
the limitations included in this subsection shall be plainly printed, written,
or engraved on each bond issued under this section.

(3) Revenue bonds with
a maturity in excess of thirty years shall not be issued. The board of
directors of the district shall by resolution determine for each revenue bond
issue the amount, date, form, terms, conditions, denominations, maximum fixed
or variable interest rate or rates, maturity or maturities, redemption rights,
registration privileges, manner of execution, manner of sale, callable
provisions, if any, and covenants including the refunding of existing revenue
bonds. Facsimile signatures may be used on the bonds and any coupons.
Refunding revenue bonds may be issued in the same manner as revenue bonds are
issued.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
10. A public centers district
may levy and fix a tax of not more than one cent on twenty cents or fraction
thereof to be paid by the person who pays an admission charge to a public
center. This includes a tax on persons who are admitted free of charge or at
reduced rates if other persons pay a charge or a regular higher charge for the
same privileges or accommodations.

The term
"admission charge" includes:

(1) A charge made for
season tickets or subscriptions;

(2) A cover charge, or
a charge made for use of seats and tables reserved or otherwise, and other
similar accommodations;

(3) A charge made for
food and refreshment if free entertainment, recreation, or amusement is
provided;

(4) A charge made for
rental or use of equipment or facilities for purposes of recreation or
amusement; if the rental of the equipment or facilities is necessary to the
enjoyment of a privilege for which a general admission is charged, the combined
charges shall be considered as the admission charge;

(5) Automobile parking
charges if the amount of the charge is determined according to the number of
passengers in the automobile.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
11. A public centers district
may levy and fix a tax on any vehicle parking charges imposed at any parking
facility that is owned or leased by the public centers district as part of a
public center. No county or city or town within which the public center is
located may impose a tax of the same or similar kind on any vehicle parking
charges at the facility. For the purposes of this section, "vehicle
parking charges" means only the actual parking charges exclusive of taxes
and service charges and the value of any other benefit conferred. The tax
authorized under this section shall be at the rate of not more than ten
percent.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
12. A new section is added
to chapter 82.14 RCW to read as follows:

The governing board of
a public centers district under chapter 35.‑- RCW (sections 1 through 11
of this act) may submit an authorizing proposition to the voters of the
district and, if the proposition is approved by a majority of persons voting,
fix and impose a sales and use tax in accordance with the terms of this
chapter.

The tax authorized in
this section shall be in addition to any other taxes authorized by law and
shall be collected from those persons who are taxable by the state under
chapters 82.08 and 82.12 RCW upon the occurrence of any taxable event within
the public centers district. The rate of tax shall not exceed two-tenths of
one percent of the selling price in the case of a sales tax, or value of the
article used in the case of a use tax.

Moneys received from
any tax imposed under this section shall be used for the purpose of providing
funds for the costs associated with the financing, design, acquisition,
construction, equipping, operating, maintaining, remodeling, repairing, and
reequipping of its public centers.

No tax may be collected
under this section by a public centers district under chapter 35.-- RCW
(sections 1 through 11 of this act) before August 1, 2001, and no tax in excess
of one-tenth of one percent may be collected under this section by a public
centers district under chapter 35.-- RCW (sections 1 through 11 of this act)
before August 1, 2001.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
13. A new section is added
to chapter 82.14 RCW to read as follows:

(1) Except as provided
in subsection (5) of this section, the governing body of a public centers
district created under chapter 35.-- RCW (sections 1 through 11 of this act)
that commences construction of new public centers, or improvement or
rehabilitation of an existing new public center, before January 1, 2005, may
impose a sales and use tax in accordance with the terms of this chapter. The
tax is in addition to other taxes authorized by law and shall be collected from
those persons who are taxable by the state under chapters 82.08 and 82.12 RCW
upon the occurrence of any taxable event within the public centers district.
The rate of tax shall not exceed 0.033 percent of the selling price in the case
of a sales tax or value of the article used in the case of a use tax.

(2) The tax imposed
under subsection (1) of this section shall be deducted from the amount of tax
otherwise required to be collected or paid over to the department of revenue
under chapter 82.08 or 82.12 RCW. The department of revenue shall perform the
collection of such taxes on behalf of the county at no cost to the public
centers district.

(3) No tax may be
collected under this section before August 1, 2001. The tax imposed in this
section shall expire when the bonds issued for the construction of the public center
and related parking facilities are retired, but not more than twenty-five years
after the tax is first collected.

(4) Moneys collected
under this section shall only be used for the purposes set forth in chapter
35.-- RCW (sections 1 through 11 of this act) and must be matched with an
amount from other public or private sources equal to thirty-three percent of
the amount collected under this section, provided that amounts generated from
nonvoter-approved taxes authorized under chapter 35.-- RCW (sections 1 through
11 of this act) shall not constitute a public or private source. For the
purpose of this section, public or private sources includes, but is not limited
to, cash or in-kind contributions used in all phases of the development or
improvement of the public center, land that is donated and used for the siting
of the public center, cash or in-kind contributions from public or private
foundations, or amounts attributed to private sector partners as part of a
public and private partnership agreement negotiated by the public centers
district.

(5) A public centers
district created under chapter 35.-- RCW (sections 1 through 11 of this act) is
not eligible to impose the tax under this section if the legislative authority
of the county where the public centers district is located has imposed a sales
and use tax under RCW 82.14.0485 or 82.14.0494.

Sec. 14. RCW 82.29A.130 and 1999
c 165 s 21 are each amended to read as follows:

The following leasehold
interests shall be exempt from taxes imposed pursuant to RCW 82.29A.030 and
82.29A.040:

(1) All leasehold
interests constituting a part of the operating properties of any public utility
which is assessed and taxed as a public utility pursuant to chapter 84.12 RCW.

(2) All leasehold
interests in facilities owned or used by a school, college or university which
leasehold provides housing for students and which is otherwise exempt from
taxation under provisions of RCW 84.36.010 and 84.36.050.

(3) All leasehold
interests of subsidized housing where the fee ownership of such property is
vested in the government of the United States, or the state of Washington or
any political subdivision thereof but only if income qualification exists for
such housing.

(4) All leasehold
interests used for fair purposes of a nonprofit fair association that sponsors
or conducts a fair or fairs which receive support from revenues collected
pursuant to RCW 67.16.100 and allocated by the director of the department of
agriculture where the fee ownership of such property is vested in the
government of the United States, the state of Washington or any of its
political subdivisions: PROVIDED, That this exemption shall not apply to the
leasehold interest of any sublessee of such nonprofit fair association if such
leasehold interest would be taxable if it were the primary lease.

(5) All leasehold
interests in any property of any public entity used as a residence by an
employee of that public entity who is required as a condition of employment to
live in the publicly owned property.

(6) All leasehold interests
held by enrolled Indians of lands owned or held by any Indian or Indian tribe
where the fee ownership of such property is vested in or held in trust by the
United States and which are not subleased to other than to a lessee which would
qualify pursuant to this chapter, RCW 84.36.451 and 84.40.175.

(7) All leasehold
interests in any real property of any Indian or Indian tribe, band, or
community that is held in trust by the United States or is subject to a
restriction against alienation imposed by the United States: PROVIDED, That
this exemption shall apply only where it is determined that contract rent paid
is greater than or equal to ninety percent of fair market rental, to be
determined by the department of revenue using the same criteria used to establish
taxable rent in RCW 82.29A.020(2)(b).

(8) All leasehold
interests for which annual taxable rent is less than two hundred fifty dollars
per year. For purposes of this subsection leasehold interests held by the same
lessee in contiguous properties owned by the same lessor shall be deemed a
single leasehold interest.

(9) All leasehold
interests which give use or possession of the leased property for a continuous
period of less than thirty days: PROVIDED, That for purposes of this
subsection, successive leases or lease renewals giving substantially continuous
use of possession of the same property to the same lessee shall be deemed a
single leasehold interest: PROVIDED FURTHER, That no leasehold interest shall
be deemed to give use or possession for a period of less than thirty days
solely by virtue of the reservation by the public lessor of the right to use
the property or to allow third parties to use the property on an occasional,
temporary basis.

(10) All leasehold
interests under month-to-month leases in residential units rented for
residential purposes of the lessee pending destruction or removal for the
purpose of constructing a public highway or building.

(11) All leasehold
interests in any publicly owned real or personal property to the extent such
leasehold interests arises solely by virtue of a contract for public
improvements or work executed under the public works statutes of this state or
of the United States between the public owner of the property and a contractor.

(12) All leasehold
interests that give use or possession of state adult correctional facilities
for the purposes of operating correctional industries under RCW 72.09.100.

(13) All leasehold
interests used to provide organized and supervised recreational activities for
disabled persons of all ages in a camp facility and for public recreational
purposes by a nonprofit organization, association, or corporation that would be
exempt from property tax under RCW 84.36.030(1) if it owned the property. If
the publicly owned property is used for any taxable purpose, the leasehold
excise taxes set forth in RCW 82.29A.030 and 82.29A.040 shall be imposed and
shall be apportioned accordingly.

(14) All leasehold
interests in the public or entertainment areas of a baseball stadium with natural
turf and a retractable roof or canopy that is in a county with a population of
over one million, that has a seating capacity of over forty thousand, and that
is constructed on or after January 1, 1995. "Public or entertainment
areas" include ticket sales areas, ramps and stairs, lobbies and
concourses, parking areas, concession areas, restaurants, hospitality and
stadium club areas, kitchens or other work areas primarily servicing other
public or entertainment areas, public rest room areas, press and media areas,
control booths, broadcast and production areas, retail sales areas, museum and
exhibit areas, scoreboards or other public displays, storage areas, loading,
staging, and servicing areas, seating areas and suites, the playing field, and
any other areas to which the public has access or which are used for the
production of the entertainment event or other public usage, and any other
personal property used for these purposes. "Public or entertainment
areas" does not include locker rooms or private offices exclusively used
by the lessee.

(15) All leasehold
interests in the public or entertainment areas of a stadium and exhibition
center, as defined in RCW 36.102.010, that is constructed on or after January
1, 1998. For the purposes of this subsection, "public or entertainment
areas" has the same meaning as in subsection (14) of this section, and
includes exhibition areas.

(16) All leasehold
interests in public facilities districts, as provided in chapter 36.100 or
35.57 RCW.

(17) All leasehold interests
in public centers districts, as provided in chapter 35.-- RCW (sections 1
through 11 of this act).

NEW SECTION. Sec.
15. Sections 1 through 11 of
this act constitute a new chapter in Title 35 RCW.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 16. If any provision of this
act or its application to any person or circumstance is held invalid, the
remainder of the act or the application of the provision to other persons or
circumstances is not affected.

---
END ---