BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF
WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1. RCW 77.15.080 and 2000 c
107 s 233 are each amended to read as follows:

Based upon articulable
facts that a person is engaged in fishing or hunting activities, fish and
wildlife officers have the authority to temporarily stop the person and check
for valid licenses, tags, permits, stamps, or catch record cards, and to
inspect all fish and wildlife in possession as well as the equipment being used
to ensure compliance with the requirements of this title. For licenses
purchased over the internet or telephone, fish and wildlife officers may
require the person, if age eighteen or older, to exhibit a driver's license or
other photo identification.

Sec. 2. RCW 77.32.420 and 2000 c
107 s 272 are each amended to read as follows:

Recreational
licenses are not transferable. Upon request of a fish and wildlife officer, ex
officio fish and wildlife officer, or authorized fish and wildlife employee, a
person hunting for game animals and furbearers, digging for, fishing
for, or possessing shellfish, or seaweed or fishing for or possessing food fish
or game fish for personal use shall exhibit the required recreational license
and write his or her signature for comparison with the signature on the
license. A person who has purchased a license over the internet or by
telephone may be required to also exhibit a valid driver's license, or other
photo identification, if age eighteen or older. Failure to comply with the
request is prima facie evidence that the person does not have a license or is
not the person named on the license.

---
END ---