BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF
WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec.
1. A new section is added
to chapter 82.04 RCW to read as follows:

The tax imposed under
RCW 82.04.240 does not apply to the assembly of an article from pumping
equipment, motor equipment, or compressor equipment, including starters,
controls, couplings, blowers, and other accessories for this equipment, if some
of the equipment and accessories are purchased from another person and the
amount paid for the purchased equipment and accessories is at least eighty
percent of the cost of the goods sold, based on materials, labor, and direct
overhead.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 2. This act takes effect
October 1, 2001.

---
END ---