BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF
WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec.
1. A new section is added
to chapter 29.04 RCW to read as follows:

(1) Nothing in this
title shall apply to conservation districts governed under chapter 89.08 RCW,
unless a conservation district chooses to have its elections governed under
this title.

(2) A conservation
district choosing to have its elections governed under this title shall:

(a) Still be governed
by other nonelection provisions of chapter 89.08 RCW;

(b) Still be governed
by RCW 89.08.160(2); and

(c) Remain solely
responsible for the costs of holding elections under this title.

(3) Any conservation district
choosing to have its elections governed under this title shall make the choice
and provide notice to any affected county auditors by May 1st in the year in
which the election is to be conducted.

(4) Candidates and
conservation district supervisors in districts that choose to have their
elections governed under this title are subject to chapter 42.17 RCW.
Candidates and conservation district supervisors in districts whose elections
are governed under chapter 89.08 RCW are exempted from the requirements of
chapter 42.17 RCW.

Sec. 2. RCW 89.08.160 and 1973
1st ex.s. c 184 s 17 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) If the
commission finds the project practicable, it shall appoint two supervisors, one
of whom shall be a landowner or operator of a farm, who shall be qualified by
training and experience to perform the specialized skilled services required of
them. They, with the three elected supervisors, two of whom shall be
landowners or operators of a farm, shall constitute the governing board of the
district.

(2) In all
subsequent appointments, at least one appointed supervisor shall be a landowner
or operator of a farm. In all subsequent elections, at least two elected
supervisors shall be landowners or operators of farms.

(3) The two
appointed supervisors shall file with the secretary of state a sworn
application, reciting that a petition was filed with the commission for the
creation of the district; that all required proceedings were had thereon; that
they were appointed by the commission as such supervisors; and that the
application is being filed to complete the organization of the district. It
shall contain the names and residences of the applicants, a certified copy of
their appointments, the name of the district, the location of the office of the
supervisors and the term of office of each applicant.

(4) The
application shall be accompanied by a statement of the commission, reciting
that a petition was filed, notice issued, and hearing held thereon as required;
that it determined the need for the district and defined the boundaries
thereof; that notice was given and an election held on the question of creating
the district; that a majority vote favored the district, and that the
commission had determined the district practicable; and shall set forth the
boundaries of the district.

Sec. 3. RCW 89.08.020 and 1999 c
305 s 1 are each amended to read as follows:

Unless the context
clearly indicates otherwise, as used in this chapter:

(1)
"Commission" and "state conservation commission" mean((s))
the agency created hereunder. All former references to "state soil and
water conservation committee", "state committee" or
"committee" shall be deemed to be references to the "state
conservation commission"((;)).

(2)
"District", or "conservation district" means a governmental
subdivision of this state and a public body corporate and politic, organized in
accordance with the provisions of chapter 184, Laws of 1973 1st ex. sess., for
the purposes, with the powers, and subject to the restrictions set forth in
this chapter. All districts created under chapter 184, Laws of 1973 1st ex.
sess. shall be known as conservation districts and shall have all the powers
and duties set out in chapter 184, Laws of 1973 1st ex. sess. All references
in chapter 184, Laws of 1973 1st ex. sess. to "districts", or
"soil and water conservation districts" shall be deemed to be
reference to "conservation districts"((;)).

(3)
"Board" and "supervisors" mean the board of supervisors of
a conservation district((;)).

(4) "Land
occupier" or "occupier of land" includes any person, firm,
political subdivision, government agency, municipality, public or private
corporation, copartnership, association, or any other entity whatsoever which
holds title to, or is in possession of, any lands lying within a district
organized under the provisions of chapter 184, Laws of 1973 1st ex. sess.,
whether as owner, lessee, renter, tenant, or otherwise((;)).

(5)
"District elector" or "voter" means a registered voter in
the county where the district is located who resides within the district
boundary or in the area affected by a petition((;)).

(6) "Due
notice" means a notice published at least twice, with at least six days
between publications, in a publication of general circulation within the
affected area, or if there is no such publication, by posting at a reasonable
number of public places within the area, where it is customary to post notices
concerning county and municipal affairs. Any hearing held pursuant to due
notice may be postponed from time to time without a new notice((;)).

(7)
"Renewable natural resources", "natural resources" or
"resources" includes land, air, water, vegetation, fish, wildlife,
wild rivers, wilderness, natural beauty, scenery and open space((;)).

(8)
"Conservation" includes conservation, development, improvement,
maintenance, preservation, protection and use, and alleviation of floodwater
and sediment damages, and the disposal of excess surface waters.

(9) "Farm
and agricultural land" means either (a) land in any contiguous ownership
of twenty or more acres devoted primarily to agricultural uses; (b) any parcel
of land five acres or more but less than twenty acres devoted primarily to
agricultural uses, which has produced a gross income from agricultural uses
equivalent to one hundred dollars or more per acre per year for three of the
five calendar years preceding the date of application for classification under
this chapter; or (c) any parcel of land of less than five acres devoted
primarily to agricultural uses which has produced a gross income of one
thousand dollars or more per year for three of the five calendar years
preceding the date of application for classification under this chapter.
Agricultural lands shall also include farm woodlots of less than twenty and
more than five acres and the land on which appurtenances necessary to
production, preparation or sale of the agricultural products exist in
conjunction with the lands producing such products. Agricultural lands shall
also include any parcel of land of one to five acres, which is not contiguous,
but which otherwise constitutes an integral part of farming operations being
conducted on land qualifying under this section as "farm and agricultural
lands".

(10) "Elected
supervisor" means a member of the board of supervisors who is not
appointed by the conservation commission and who is elected under section 1 of
this act or under this chapter.

Sec. 4. RCW 89.08.400 and 1992 c
70 s 1 are each amended to read as follows:

For those districts
that have chosen to conduct elections of supervisors pursuant to this chapter:

(1) Special assessments
are authorized to be imposed for conservation districts as provided in this
section. Activities and programs to conserve natural resources, including soil
and water, are declared to be of special benefit to lands and may be used as
the basis upon which special assessments are imposed.

(2)(a) Special
assessments to finance the activities of a conservation district may be imposed
by the county legislative authority of the county in which the conservation
district is located for a period or periods each not to exceed ten years in
duration.

The supervisors of a
conservation district shall hold a public hearing on a proposed system of
assessments prior to the first day of August in the year prior to which it is
proposed that the initial special assessments be collected. At that public
hearing, the supervisors shall gather information and shall alter the proposed
system of assessments when appropriate, including the number of years during
which it is proposed that the special assessments be imposed.

(b) On or before
the first day of August in that year, the supervisors of a conservation
district shall file the proposed system of assessments, indicating the years
during which it is proposed that the special assessments shall be imposed, and
a proposed budget for the succeeding year with the county legislative authority
of the county within which the conservation district is located. The county
legislative authority shall hold a public hearing on the proposed system of
assessments. After the hearing, the county legislative authority may accept,
or modify and accept, the proposed system of assessments, including the number
of years during which the special assessments shall be imposed, if it finds
that both the public interest will be served by the imposition of the special
assessments and that the special assessments to be imposed on any land will not
exceed the special benefit that the land receives or will receive from the
activities of the conservation district. The findings of the county legislative
authority shall be final and conclusive.

(c) Special
assessments may be altered during this period on individual parcels in
accordance with the system of assessments if land is divided or land uses or
other factors change.

(d) Notice of
the public hearings held by the supervisors and the county legislative
authority shall be posted conspicuously in at least five places throughout the
conservation district, and published once a week for two consecutive weeks in a
newspaper in general circulation throughout the conservation district, with the
date of the last publication at least five days prior to the public hearing.

(3) A system of
assessments shall classify lands in the conservation district into suitable
classifications according to benefits conferred or to be conferred by the
activities of the conservation district, determine an annual per acre rate of
assessment for each classification of land, and indicate the total amount of
special assessments proposed to be obtained from each classification of lands.
Lands deemed not to receive benefit from the activities of the conservation
district shall be placed into a separate classification and shall not be
subject to the special assessments. An annual assessment rate shall be stated
as either uniform annual per acre amount, or an annual flat rate per parcel
plus a uniform annual rate per acre amount, for each classification of land.
The maximum annual per acre special assessment rate shall not exceed ten cents
per acre. The maximum annual per parcel rate shall not exceed five dollars.

Public land, including
lands owned or held by the state, shall be subject to special assessments to
the same extent as privately owned lands. The procedures provided in chapter
79.44 RCW shall be followed if lands owned or held by the state are subject to
the special assessments of a conservation district.

Forest lands used
solely for the planting, growing, or harvesting of trees may be subject to
special assessments if such lands benefit from the activities of the
conservation district, but the per acre rate of special assessment on benefited
forest lands shall not exceed one-tenth of the weighted average per acre
assessment on all other lands within the conservation district that are subject
to its special assessments. The calculation of the weighted average per acre
special assessment shall be a ratio calculated as follows: (a) The numerator
shall be the total amount of money estimated to be derived from the imposition
of per acre special assessments on the nonforest lands in the conservation
district; and (b) the denominator shall be the total number of nonforest land
acres in the conservation district that receive benefit from the activities of
the conservation district and which are subject to the special assessments of
the conservation district. No more than ten thousand acres of such forest
lands that is both owned by the same person or entity and is located in the
same conservation district may be subject to the special assessments that are
imposed for that conservation district in any year. Per parcel charges shall
not be imposed on forest land parcels. However, in lieu of a per parcel
charge, a charge of up to three dollars per forest landowner may be imposed on
each owner of forest lands whose forest lands are subject to a per acre rate of
assessment.

(4) A conservation
district shall prepare an assessment roll that implements the system of
assessments approved by the county legislative authority. The special
assessments from the assessment roll shall be spread by the county assessor as
a separate item on the tax rolls and shall be collected and accounted for with
property taxes by the county treasurer. The amount of a special assessment
shall constitute a lien against the land that shall be subject to the same
conditions as a tax lien, collected by the treasurer in the same manner as
delinquent real property taxes, and subject to the same interest rate and
penalty as for delinquent property taxes. The county treasurer shall deduct an
amount, as established by the county legislative authority, from the
collected special assessments((, as established by the county legislative
authority,)) to cover the costs incurred by the county assessor and county
treasurer in spreading and collecting the special assessments, but not to
exceed the actual costs of such work.

(5) The special
assessments for a conservation district shall not be spread on the tax rolls
and shall not be collected with property tax collections in the following year
if, after the system of assessments has been approved by the county legislative
authority but prior to the fifteenth day of December in that year, a petition
has been filed with the county legislative authority objecting to the
imposition of such special assessments, which petition has been signed by at
least twenty percent of the owners of land that would be subject to the special
assessments to be imposed for a conservation district.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
5. A new section is added
to chapter 89.08 RCW to read as follows:

For those districts
that have chosen to conduct elections of supervisors pursuant to Title 29 RCW:

(1) Special assessments
are authorized to be imposed for conservation districts as provided in this
section. Activities and programs to conserve natural resources, including soil
and water, are declared to be of special benefit to lands and may be used as
the basis upon which special assessments are imposed.

(2)(a) Special
assessments to finance the activities of a conservation district may be imposed
by the board of supervisors for a period or periods each not to exceed ten
years in duration.

The supervisors of a
conservation district shall hold a public hearing on a proposed system of
assessments prior to the first day of August in the year prior to which it is
proposed that the initial special assessments be collected. At that public
hearing, the supervisors shall gather information and shall alter the proposed
system of assessments when appropriate, including the number of years during
which it is proposed that the special assessments be imposed.

(b) After the public
hearing, if the board of supervisors finds that both the public interest will
be served by the imposition of the special assessments and that the special
assessments to be imposed on any land will not exceed the special benefit that the
land receives or will receive from the activities of the conservation district,
the board of supervisors shall impose the assessments.

(c) Special assessments
may be altered during this period on individual parcels in accordance with the
system of assessments if land is divided or land uses or other factors change.

(d) Notice of the
public hearings held by the supervisors shall be posted conspicuously in at
least five places throughout the conservation district, and published once a
week for two consecutive weeks in a newspaper in general circulation throughout
the conservation district, with the date of the last publication at least five
days prior to the public hearing.

(3) A system of
assessments shall classify lands in the conservation district into suitable
classifications according to benefits conferred or to be conferred by the
activities of the conservation district, determine an annual per acre rate of
assessment for each classification of land, and indicate the total amount of
special assessments proposed to be obtained from each classification of lands.
Lands deemed not to receive benefit from the activities of the conservation
district shall be placed into a separate classification and shall not be
subject to the special assessments. An annual assessment rate shall be stated
as either uniform annual per acre amount, or an annual flat rate per parcel
plus a uniform annual rate per acre amount, for each classification of land.
The maximum annual per acre special assessment rate shall not exceed ten cents
per acre. The maximum annual per parcel rate shall not exceed five dollars.

Public land, including
lands owned or held by the state, shall be subject to special assessments to
the same extent as privately owned lands. The procedures provided in chapter
79.44 RCW shall be followed if lands owned or held by the state are subject to
the special assessments of a conservation district.

Forest lands used
solely for the planting, growing, or harvesting of trees may be subject to
special assessments if such lands benefit from the activities of the
conservation district, but the per acre rate of special assessment on benefited
forest lands shall not exceed one-tenth of the weighted average per acre
assessment on all other lands within the conservation district that are subject
to its special assessments. The calculation of the weighted average per acre
special assessment shall be a ratio calculated as follows: (a) The numerator
shall be the total amount of money estimated to be derived from the imposition
of per acre special assessments on the nonforest lands in the conservation
district; and (b) the denominator shall be the total number of nonforest land
acres in the conservation district that receive benefit from the activities of
the conservation district and which are subject to the special assessments of
the conservation district. No more than ten thousand acres of such forest
lands that is both owned by the same person or entity and is located in the
same conservation district may be subject to the special assessments that are
imposed for that conservation district in any year. Per parcel charges shall
not be imposed on forest land parcels. However, in lieu of a per parcel
charge, a charge of up to three dollars per forest landowner may be imposed on
each owner of forest lands whose forest lands are subject to a per acre rate of
assessment.

(4) A conservation
district shall prepare an assessment roll that implements the system of
assessments approved by the board of supervisors. The special assessments from
the assessment roll shall be spread by the county assessor as a separate item
on the tax rolls and shall be collected and accounted for with property taxes
by the county treasurer. The amount of a special assessment shall constitute a
lien against the land that shall be subject to the same conditions as a tax
lien, collected by the treasurer in the same manner as delinquent real property
taxes, and subject to the same interest rate and penalty as for delinquent
property taxes. The county treasurer shall deduct an amount, as established by
the county legislative authority, from the collected special assessments to
cover the costs incurred by the county assessor and county treasurer in
spreading and collecting the special assessments, but not to exceed the actual
costs of such work.

(5) The special
assessments for a conservation district shall not be spread on the tax rolls
and shall not be collected with property tax collections in the following year
if, after the system of assessments has been approved by the board of
supervisors, but prior to the fifteenth day of December in that year, a
petition has been filed with the board of supervisors objecting to the
imposition of such special assessments, which petition has been signed by at
least twenty percent of the owners of land that would be subject to the special
assessments to be imposed for a conservation district.

Sec. 6. RCW 89.08.200 and 1973
1st ex.s. c 184 s 21 are each amended to read as follows:

The term of office of
each supervisor shall be ((three)) four years and until his or
her successor is appointed or elected and qualified, except that the
supervisors first appointed shall serve for ((one)) two and ((two))
four years respectively from the date of their appointments, as
designated in their appointments.

In the case of elected
supervisors, the term of office of each supervisor shall be ((three)) four
years and until his or her successor is elected and qualified, except
that for the first election, the one receiving the largest number of votes
shall be elected for ((three)) four years; the next largest ((two))
three years; and the third largest ((one year)) two years.
Successors shall be elected for ((three-year)) four-year terms.

Vacancies in the office
of appointed supervisors shall be filled by the state conservation commission.
Vacancies in the office of elected supervisors shall be filled by appointment
made by the remaining supervisors for the unexpired term.

A majority of the
supervisors shall constitute a quorum and the concurrence of a majority is
required for any official action or determination.

Supervisors shall serve
without compensation, but they shall be entitled to expenses, including
traveling expenses, necessarily incurred in discharge of their duties. A
supervisor may be removed by the state conservation commission upon notice and
hearing, for neglect of duty or malfeasance in office, but for no other reason.

The governing board
shall designate a ((chairman)) chair from time to time.

For elected
supervisors whose terms expire in 2001, a special election shall be in the last
quarter of 2001, with election procedures as specified in RCW 89.08.190 (2) or
(3).

For elected
supervisors whose terms would expire in 2002 but for this act, the general
election shall be in 2003, with election procedures as specified in RCW
89.08.190 (2) or (3).

For elected
supervisors whose terms expire in 2003, the general election shall be in 2003,
with election procedures as specified in RCW 89.08.190 (2) or (3). All
incumbent supervisors whose terms would have expired but for this act shall
remain in office until their successors are elected and qualified.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 7. This act is necessary for
the immediate preservation of the public peace, health, or safety, or support
of the state government and its existing public institutions, and takes effect
immediately.

---
END ---