BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF
WASHINGTON:

_5 Sec. 1. RCW
60.11.010 and 2000 c 250 s 9A-824 are each amended to

_6 read as follows:

_7 As used in this chapter, the following terms have
the meanings

_8 indicated unless the context clearly requires otherwise.

_9 (1) "Agricultural bailment contract"
means any bailment

10 contract for increasing, growing, or raising an
agricultural

11 product or products where the bailor retains title to
the

12 agricultural products increased, grown, or raised
including but

13 not limited to any agricultural products or progeny
produced under

14 the contract. "Agricultural bailment
contract" includes, but is not

15 limited to, a seed bailment contract under chapter
15.48 RCW.

16 (2) "Agricultural product" means (a)
any crop including but not

17 limited to any seed, cuttings, stock, or similar
materials

18 provided by a bailor to produce the crop; and (b)
livestock, other

p. 1 HB
1503

_1 than horses, mules, cattle, or sheep, and including
but not

_2 limited to any progeny of such livestock that are
produced under

_3 an agricultural bailment contract.

_4 (3) "Bailee" means any tenant farmer or
landowner, or both,

_5 who, for an agreed compensation, agrees under the
terms of an

_6 agricultural bailment contract (a) to plant
agricultural seeds,

_7 cuttings, stock, or similar materials furnished by
the bailor, to

_8 care for and cultivate them, and to harvest and
deliver to the

_9 bailor the agricultural product or products resulting
therefrom;

10 or (b) to feed, raise, and care for livestock
furnished by the

11 bailor for return to the bailor along with any progeny
resulting

12 therefrom. "Bailee" includes, but is not
limited to, a bailee under

13 chapter 15.48 RCW.

14 (4) "Bailor" means any contractor who
delivers agricultural

15 seed, cuttings, stock, or similar materials or
livestock to a

16 bailee under the terms of an agricultural bailment
contract which

17 requires the bailor to pay the bailee the amount of
compensation

18 agreed to in the contract for the bailee's services
in (a)

19 planting agricultural seeds or similar materials,
caring for and

20 cultivating them, and harvesting and delivering the
resulting

21 agricultural products to the bailor; or (b) feeding,
raising, and

22 caring for livestock furnished by the bailor for
return to the

23 bailor along with any progeny therefrom.
"Bailor" includes, but is

24 not limited to, a bailor under chapter 15.48 RCW.

25 (5) "Crop" means all products of
the soil either growing or

26 cropped, cut, or gathered which require annual planting,

27 harvesting, or cultivating. A crop includes orchard
crops, but does

28 not include vegetation produced by the powers of nature
alone,

29 nursery stock, or vegetation intended as a permanent
enhancement

30 of the land itself.

31 (((2))) (6) "Handler" means
a person who prepares an orchard

32 crop for market for the account of, or as agent for, the
producer

33 of the orchard crop, which preparation includes, but is
not

34 limited to, receiving, storing, packing, marketing,
selling, or

35 delivering the orchard crop; and who takes delivery of
the orchard

36 crop from the producer of the orchard crop or from
another

37 handler. "Handler" does not include a person
who solely transports

HB 1503 p. 2

_1 the orchard crop from the producer or another handler to
another

_2 person.

_3 (((3))) (7) "Landlord" means
a person who leases or subleases

_4 to a tenant real property upon which crops are growing
or will be

_5 grown.

_6 (((4))) (8) "Orchard crop"
means cherries, peaches, nectarines,

_7 plums or prunes, pears, apricots, and apples.

_8 (((5))) (9) "Secured party"
and "security interest" have the

_9 same meaning as used in the Uniform Commercial Code,
Title 62A

10 RCW.

11 (((6))) (10) "Supplier"
includes, but is not limited to, a

12 person who furnishes seed, furnishes and/or applies
commercial

13 fertilizer, pesticide, fungicide, weed killer, or
herbicide,

14 including spraying and dusting, upon the land of the
grower or

15 landowner, or furnishes any work or labor upon the land
of the

16 grower or landowner including tilling, preparing for the
growing

17 of crops, sowing, planting, cultivating, cutting,
digging,

18 picking, pulling, or otherwise harvesting any crop grown
thereon,

19 or in gathering, securing, or housing any crop grown
thereon, or

20 in threshing any grain or hauling to any warehouse any
crop,

21 including grain, grown thereon.

22 (((7))) (11) "Lien debtor"
means the person who is obligated or

23 owes payment or other performance. If the lien debtor
and the owner

24 of the property encumbered by the crop lien or security
interest

25 are not the same person, "lien debtor" means
the owner of the

26 property encumbered by the crop lien or security
interest.

27 (((8))) (12) "Lien holder"
means a person who, by statute, has

28 acquired a lien on the property of the lien debtor, or
such

29 person's successor in interest.

30 Sec. 2. RCW
60.11.020 and 2000 c 250 s 9A-825 are each amended to

31 read as follows:

32 (1) A landlord whose lease or other agreement with
the tenant

33 provides for cash rental payment shall have a lien upon
all crops

34 grown upon the demised land in which the landlord has an
interest

35 for payment of no more than one year's rent, where the
last or

36 only payment of such one year's rent is due or will
become due

37 within six months following the last day of harvest of
the crops

p. 3 HB
1503

_1 encumbered by the crop lien. A landlord with a crop
share agreement

_2 has an interest in the growing crop which shall not be
encumbered

_3 by crop liens except as provided in subsections (2) and
(3) of

_4 this section.

_5 (2) A supplier shall have a lien upon all crops for
which the

_6 supplies are used or applied for payment of the purchase
price of

_7 the supplies and/or services performed: PROVIDED, That
the

_8 landlord's interest in the crop shall only be subject to
the lien

_9 for the amount obligated to be paid by the landlord if
prior

10 written consent of the landlord is obtained or if the
landlord has

11 agreed in writing with the tenant to pay or be
responsible for a

12 portion of the supplies and/or services provided by the
lien

13 holder.

14 (3) A handler shall have a lien on all orchard crops
delivered

15 by the lien debtor or another handler to the handler and
on all

16 proceeds of the orchard crops for payment of: (a) All
customary

17 charges for the ordinary and necessary handling of the
orchard

18 crop, including but not limited to charges for
transporting,

19 receiving, inspecting, materials and supplies furnished,
washing,

20 waxing, sorting, packing, storing, promoting, marketing,
selling,

21 advertising, insuring, or otherwise handling the lien
debtor's

22 orchard crop; and (b) reasonable cooperative per unit
retainages,

23 and for all governmental or quasi-governmental
assessments imposed

24 by statute, ordinance, or government regulation.
Charges shall not

25 include direct or indirect advances or extensions of
credit to a

26 lien debtor.

27 (4) A tenant farmer or landowner who is a bailee
shall have a

28 lien, called a producer's lien, upon all agricultural
products

29 grown, raised, or produced by the bailee under an
agricultural

30 bailment contract and on all proceeds of the
agricultural products

31 for the payment of the amount of compensation agreed
to in the

32 contract for the services performed by the bailee
under the

33 contract.

34 Sec. 3. RCW
60.11.030 and 2000 c 250 s 9A-826 are each amended to

35 read as follows:

36 (1) Upon the later of both: (a) Execution of the
lease or other

37 agreement, or commencement of delivery of such supplies,
and/or of

HB 1503 p. 4

_1 provision of such services giving rise to the crop lien;
and (b)

_2 filing a financing statement as required by RCW
62A.9A-310 and

_3 subsection (3) of this section, the crop liens described
in RCW

_4 60.11.020 (1) and (2) shall become effective and attach
to the

_5 subject crop for all sums then and thereafter due and
owing the

_6 lien holder under this chapter, and those liens shall
continue in

_7 all identifiable cash proceeds of the crop.

_8 (2) Upon the delivery of an orchard crop by the lien
debtor or

_9 another handler to a handler without the necessity of
filing, the

10 crop lien described in RCW 60.11.020(3) shall become
effective and

11 attach to and be perfected in the delivered orchard crop
for all

12 sums then and thereafter due and owing the lien holder
under this

13 chapter, and the lien shall continue and be perfected in
all

14 proceeds of the orchard crop. Upon filing a financing
statement as

15 required by RCW 62A.9A-310 and subsection (3) of this
section, an

16 effective crop lien described in RCW 60.11.020(3) that
has

17 attached to the delivered orchard crop shall be
perfected.

18 (3) Except as provided in RCW 60.11.040(4) with
respect to the

19 lien of a landlord, and except for the lien of a handler
on

20 orchard crops as provided in RCW 60.11.020(3) and the
producer's

21 lien as provided in RCW 60.11.020(4), the lien
holder must file

22 the required financing statement during the period after
the

23 commencement of delivery of such supplies and/or of
provision of

24 such services, but before the completion of the harvest
of the

25 crops for which the lien is claimed, or in the case of a
lien for

26 furnishing work or labor, before the end of the fortieth
day after

27 the cessation of the work or labor for which the lien is
claimed.

28 If the lien holder under the crop liens described in RCW
60.11.020

29 (1) or (2) is to be allowed costs, disbursements, and
attorneys'

30 fees, the lien holder must also mail a copy of such
financing

31 statement to the last known address of the debtor by
certified

32 mail, return receipt requested, within ten days after
filing the

33 financing statement.

34 (4) Upon the delivery of agricultural seed or
stock or

35 livestock by a bailor to a bailee and without
necessity of filing,

36 the producer's lien described in RCW 60.11.020(4)
shall become

37 effective and attach to and be perfected in the seed,
cuttings,

38 stock, or similar materials or livestock and in any
resulting

p. 5 HB
1503

_1 agricultural products produced under the agricultural
bailment

_2 contract for all sums then and thereafter due and
owing the bailee

_3 as lien holder under this chapter, and the lien shall
continue and

_4 be perfected in all proceeds of the seed, cuttings,
stock, or

_5 similar materials or livestock or any resulting
agricultural

_6 products produced under the agricultural bailment
contract.

_7 Sec. 4. RCW
60.11.050 and 2000 c 250 s 9A-828 are each amended to

_8 read as follows:

_9 (1) Except as provided in subsections (2), (3), (4),
((and))

10 (5), and (6) of this section, conflicting liens
and security

11 interests in crops and their proceeds shall rank in
accordance

12 with the time of filing.

13 (2) The lien created in RCW 60.11.020(2) in favor of
any person

14 who furnishes any work or labor upon the land of the
grower or

15 landowner shall be preferred and prior to any other lien
or

16 security interest upon the crops to which they attach
including

17 the liens described in subsections (3), (4), ((and))
(5), and (6)

18 of this section.

19 (3) The producer's lien created in RCW
60.11.020(4) in favor of

20 a bailee is preferred and prior to a lien or security
interest

21 described in subsection (4), (5), or (6) of this
section and to

22 any other lien or security interest upon the
agricultural products

23 to which they attach except the liens in favor of a
person who

24 furnishes work or labor upon the land of the grower
or landlord.

25 (4) The lien created in RCW 60.11.020(3) in
favor of handlers

26 is preferred and prior to a lien or security interest
described in

27 subsection (((4) or)) (5) or (6) of this
section and to any other

28 lien or security interest upon the orchard crops to which
they

29 attach except the liens in favor of a person who
furnishes work or

30 labor upon the land of the grower or landlord. Whenever
more than

31 one handler holds a handler's lien created by RCW
60.11.020(3) in

32 the same orchard crop, unless the affected parties
otherwise agree

33 in writing, the later of the liens to attach has
priority over all

34 previously attached handlers' liens created by RCW
60.11.020(3).

35 (((4))) (5) A lien or security
interest in crops otherwise

36 entitled to priority pursuant to subsection (1) of this
section

37 shall be subordinate to a later perfected lien or
security

HB 1503 p. 6

_1 interest incurred to produce the crop to the extent that

_2 obligations secured by such earlier perfected security
interest or

_3 lien were not incurred to produce such crops.

_4 (((5))) (6) A lien or security
interest in crops otherwise

_5 entitled to priority pursuant to subsection (1) of this
section

_6 shall be subordinate to a properly perfected landlord's
lien.

_7 Sec. 5. RCW
60.11.130 and 2000 c 250 s 9A-833 are each amended to

_8 read as follows:

_9 Judicial foreclosure or summary procedure as
provided in RCW

10 60.11.060 shall be brought within twenty-four calendar
months

11 after filing the financing statement for the lien,
except: (1) In

12 the case of a landlord lien which shall be twenty-four
calendar

13 months from the date of default on the lease((, and));
(2) in the

14 case of a handler's lien on a given orchard crop which
shall be

15 twenty-four calendar months from the date of default on
payment of

16 the charges described in RCW 60.11.020(3) attributable
to that

17 orchard crop; and (3) in the case of a producer's
lien on a given

18 agricultural product which shall be twenty-four
calendar months

19 from the date of default on payment of the charges
described in

20 RCW 60.11.020(4) attributable to that product.
Upon expiration of

21 such time, the claimed lien shall expire.

22 Sec. 6. RCW
62A.9A-310 and 2000 c 250 s 9A-310 are each amended to

23 read as follows:

24 (a) General rule: Perfection by filing.
Except as otherwise

25 provided in subsections (b) and (d) of this section and
RCW

26 62A.9A‑312(b), a financing statement must be filed
to perfect all

27 security interests and agricultural liens.

28 (b) Exceptions: Filing not necessary. The
filing of a financing

29 statement is not necessary to perfect a security
interest:

30 (1) That is perfected under RCW 62A.9A‑308
(d), (e), (f), or

31 (g);

32 (2) That is perfected under RCW 62A.9A‑309
when it attaches;

33 (3) In property subject to a statute, regulation, or
treaty

34 described in RCW 62A.9A‑311(a);

35 (4) In goods in possession of a bailee which is perfected
under

36 RCW 62A.9A‑312(d) (1) or (2);

p. 7 HB
1503

_1 (5) In certificated securities, documents, goods, or

_2 instruments which is perfected without filing or
possession under

_3 RCW 62A.9A‑312 (e), (f), or (g);

_4 (6) In collateral in the secured party's possession
under RCW

_5 62A.9A‑313;

_6 (7) In a certificated security which is perfected by
delivery

_7 of the security certificate to the secured party under
RCW

_8 62A.9A‑313;

_9 (8) In deposit accounts, electronic chattel paper,
investment

10 property, or letter-of-credit rights which is perfected
by control

11 under RCW 62A.9A‑314;

12 (9) In proceeds which is perfected under RCW 62A.9A‑315;
or

13 (10) That is perfected under RCW 62A.9A‑316.

14 (c) Assignment of perfected security interest.
If a secured

15 party assigns a perfected security interest or
agricultural lien,

16 a filing under this Article is not required to continue
the

17 perfected status of the security interest against
creditors of and

18 transferees from the original debtor.

19 (d) Further exception: Filing not necessary for
handler's lien.

20 The filing of a financing statement is not necessary to
perfect

21 the agricultural lien of a handler on orchard crops as
provided in

22 RCW 60.11.020(3) or to perfect a producer's lien as
provided in

23 RCW 60.11.020(4).

24 Sec. 7. RCW
15.48.290 and 1967 c 114 s 16 are each amended to read

25 as follows:

26 All payments of money required by the terms of a
seed bailment

27 contract to be made by a bailor to a bailee shall be
subject to

28 ((security interests perfected as required by chapter
62A.9 RCW,

29 as amended, and all)) agricultural liens provided
for and

30 perfected in accordance with Title 60 RCW.

‑‑‑ END ‑‑‑

HB 1503 p. 8