BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF
WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1. RCW 90.03.380 and 1997 c
442 s 801 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) The right to the
use of water which has been applied to a beneficial use in the state shall be
and remain appurtenant to the land or place upon which the same is used: PROVIDED,
HOWEVER, That the right may be transferred to another or to others and become
appurtenant to any other land or place of use without loss of priority of right
theretofore established if such change can be made without detriment or injury
to existing rights. The point of diversion of water for beneficial use or the
purpose of use may be changed, if such change can be made without detriment or
injury to existing rights. A change in the place of use, point of diversion,
and/or purpose of use of a water right to enable irrigation of additional
acreage or the addition of new uses may be permitted if such change results in
no increase in the annual consumptive quantity of water used under the water
right. For purposes of this section, "annual consumptive quantity"
means the estimated or actual annual amount of water diverted pursuant to the
water right, reduced by the estimated annual amount of return flows, averaged
over the most recent five-year period of continuous beneficial use of the water
right. Before any transfer of such right to use water or change of the point
of diversion of water or change of purpose of use can be made, any person
having an interest in the transfer or change, shall file a written application
therefor with the department, and the application shall not be granted until
notice of the application is published as provided in RCW 90.03.280. If it
shall appear that such transfer or such change may be made without injury or
detriment to existing rights, the department shall issue to the applicant a
certificate in duplicate granting the right for such transfer or for such
change of point of diversion or of use. The certificate so issued shall be
filed and be made a record with the department and the duplicate certificate
issued to the applicant may be filed with the county auditor in like manner and
with the same effect as provided in the original certificate or permit to
divert water.

(2) If an application
for change proposes to transfer water rights from one irrigation district to
another, the department shall, before publication of notice, receive
concurrence from each of the irrigation districts that such transfer or change
will not adversely affect the ability to deliver water to other landowners or
impair the financial integrity of either of the districts.

(3) A change in place
of use by an individual water user or users of water provided by an irrigation
district need only receive approval for the change from the board of directors
of the district if the use of water continues within the irrigation district,
and when water is provided by an irrigation entity that is a member of a board
of joint control created under chapter 87.80 RCW, approval need only be
received from the board of joint control if the use of water continues within
the area of jurisdiction of the joint board and the change can be made without
detriment or injury to existing rights.

(4) This section shall
not apply to trust water rights acquired by the state through the funding of
water conservation projects under chapter 90.38 RCW or RCW 90.42.010 through
90.42.070.

(5) The right to use
water for any beneficial use within the general category of an agricultural use
includes the right to use the water for any other beneficial use within the
general category of an agricultural use as long as the use is within the
limitations of the water right regarding priority, place of use, point of
diversion, water source, and annual quantity of water. The authority provided
by this subsection (5) may be exercised without securing the approval of the
department or any other governmental entity; however, to exercise this
authority for an alteration of purpose of use within the general category other
than a change in crops or cropping patterns including but not limited to crop rotation,
the water right holder shall first notify the department of the alteration.
The general category of an agricultural use of water is composed of the
beneficial uses of water for agricultural irrigation, watering livestock, and
processing agricultural commodities.

Sec. 2. RCW 90.44.100 and 1997 c
316 s 2 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) After an
application to, and upon the issuance by the department of an amendment to the
appropriate permit or certificate of ground water right, the holder of a valid
right to withdraw public ground waters may, without losing the holder's
priority of right, construct wells or other means of withdrawal at a new
location in substitution for or in addition to those at the original location,
or the holder may change the manner or the place of use of the water.

(2) An amendment to
construct replacement or a new additional well or wells at a location outside
of the location of the original well or wells or to change the manner or place
of use of the water shall be issued only after publication of notice of the
application and findings as prescribed in the case of an original application.
Such amendment shall be issued by the department only on the conditions that:
(a) The additional or replacement well or wells shall tap the same body of
public ground water as the original well or wells; (b) where a replacement well
or wells is approved, the use of the original well or wells shall be
discontinued and the original well or wells shall be properly decommissioned as
required under chapter 18.104 RCW; (c) where an additional well or wells is
constructed, the original well or wells may continue to be used, but the
combined total withdrawal from the original and additional well or wells shall
not enlarge the right conveyed by the original permit or certificate; and (d)
other existing rights shall not be impaired. The department may specify an
approved manner of construction and shall require a showing of compliance with
the terms of the amendment, as provided in RCW 90.44.080 in the case of an
original permit.

(3) The construction of
a replacement or new additional well or wells at the location of the original
well or wells shall be allowed without application to the department for an
amendment. However, the following apply to such a replacement or new
additional well: (a) The well shall tap the same body of public ground water
as the original well or wells; (b) if a replacement well is constructed, the
use of the original well or wells shall be discontinued and the original well
or wells shall be properly decommissioned as required under chapter 18.104 RCW;
(c) if a new additional well is constructed, the original well or wells may
continue to be used, but the combined total withdrawal from the original and
additional well or wells shall not enlarge the right conveyed by the original
water use permit or certificate; (d) the construction and use of the well shall
not interfere with or impair water rights with an earlier date of priority than
the water right or rights for the original well or wells; (e) the replacement
or additional well shall be located no closer than the original well to a well
it might interfere with; (f) the department may specify an approved manner of
construction of the well; and (g) the department shall require a showing of
compliance with the conditions of this subsection (3).

(4) As used in this
section, the "location of the original well or wells" is the area
described as the point of withdrawal in the original public notice published
for the application for the water right for the well.

(5) The
right to use water for any beneficial use within the general category of an
agricultural use includes the right to use the water for any other beneficial
use within the general category of an agricultural use as long as the use is
within the limitations of the water right regarding priority, place of use,
water source, and annual quantity of water. It must also be within the
limitations of the water right regarding point of withdrawal except as
authorized by subsection (3) of this section. The authority provided by this
subsection (5) may be exercised without securing the approval of the department
or any other governmental entity; however, to exercise this authority for an alteration
of purpose of use within the general category other than a change in crops or
cropping patterns including but not limited to crop rotation, the water right
holder shall first notify the department of the alteration. The general
category of an agricultural use of water is composed of the beneficial uses of
water for agricultural irrigation, watering livestock, and processing
agricultural commodities.

---
END ---