BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF
WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec.
1. A new section is added
to chapter 15.54 RCW to read as follows:

It is unlawful for any
person to apply a commercial fertilizer or to supervise directly the
application of a commercial fertilizer to the soils of any parcel of land
within an urban area to produce, maintain, or enhance plants or plant growth
unless a sufficient number of soil samples have first been taken and tested to
characterize generally the levels of plant nutrients present in the soils on
the parcel without the application. Such a characterization of the soil
nutrients shall be required for applications to such a parcel not more than
once each calendar year. This section does not apply to applications of
fertilizer to soils that are contained in pots, planters, or similar devices separated
from ground soil and not designed to drain to ground soil.

For the
purposes of this section, "urban area" means an urban growth area
designated under RCW 36.70A.110 with a population of five hundred thousand or
more or, in a county not planning under chapter 36.70A RCW, a city with a
population of five hundred thousand or more.

--- END ---