BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF
WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec.
1. A new section is added
to chapter 74.34 RCW to read as follows:

(1) In addition to any
registry maintained by the department to satisfy participation requirements of
federally funded programs, the department shall establish and maintain a state
caregiver registry containing names of, and other identifying information
about, individuals who have been found to have abandoned, abused, financially
exploited, or neglected vulnerable adults. The department shall remove the
name of any individual from the caregiver registry who: (a) Later is found by
the office of appeals under chapter 34.05 RCW, or a court of law not to have
abandoned, abused, financially exploited, or neglected vulnerable adults; or
(b) was erroneously placed upon the registry.

(2) The department
shall adopt rules that are necessary to implement the caregiver registry. At a
minimum, the rules shall address: (a) Disclosure; (b) disposition; (c)
notification of findings, appeal rights, and fair hearing requirements; (d) the
opportunity for the individual who is the subject of the investigation to
provide information orally or in writing prior to the preliminary
determination; and (e) requirements for employers to check the caregiver
registry.

(3) When a nursing
home, boarding home, or adult family home, or an employer providing in-home
services under chapter 70.127 RCW or services authorized under RCW
71A.12.040(10) and 74.09.520, reasonably relies on information obtained from
the caregiver registry, the employer shall be immune from liability for an
employment decision based exclusively upon information obtained directly from
the registry.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
2. A new section is added
to chapter 74.34 RCW to read as follows:

(1) If following an
investigation into allegations that an individual abandoned, abused,
financially exploited, or neglected a vulnerable adult, the department
determines that a preponderance of evidence exists to support the allegation,
the department shall make a preliminary determination of abandonment, abuse,
financial exploitation, or neglect. Prior to making a preliminary
determination, the department must make reasonable efforts to notify the
individual of the investigation and of the opportunity to provide information
orally or in writing, regarding the allegations under investigation. The
department shall not make a preliminary determination of neglect if the
individual demonstrates that the neglect was caused by factors beyond his or
her control. If the nursing care quality assurance commission and the
department of health have completed a full investigation and have taken no
action against a nurse licensed under chapter 18.79 RCW, the department shall
not initiate an investigation into the same allegation of abuse, neglect, or
financial exploitation in an in-home setting or in a facility licensed under
chapter 18.51, 70.128, or 18.20 RCW that may result in an individual's name
being placed on the caregiver registry. The individual shall be notified of
the preliminary determination and shall be entitled to appeal the preliminary
finding in an adjudicative proceeding under chapter 34.05 RCW. If the
individual does not request an adjudicative proceeding within the time allowed
for appeal, or if a presiding officer issues an initial order upholding the
department's determination following an adjudicative proceeding, the
preliminary determination shall be considered a finding and the department
shall place such finding on the caregiver registry described in section 1 of
this act. This section does not apply to findings of abandonment, abuse,
financial exploitation, or neglect by an individual who is a vulnerable adult
and who has the functional, mental, or physical inability to care for himself
or herself or who has been found incapacitated under chapter 11.88 RCW.

(2) Nothing in this
section shall be construed as prohibiting the department from activities that
are authorized under chapter 18.20, 18.51, or 70.128 RCW, this chapter, or Titles
XVIII and XIX of the federal social security act.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
3. A new section is added
to chapter 74.34 RCW to read as follows:

In the case of a single
finding of neglect, and at least one year after the individual's name has been
placed on the caregiver registry, the individual may petition the department
for removal of his or her name from the caregiver registry, or the individual
may petition the department to be allowed to work in a licensed nursing home,
boarding home, or adult family home unless the individual has been convicted of
a crime that disqualifies him or her from working in such a facility. The
rules developed by the department shall describe how the petition can be filed,
and shall identify criteria that the department will apply when making a
decision on the petition.

Any individual whose
name has been on the caregiver registry for ten consecutive years may petition
for the removal of his or her name from the caregiver registry for any reason.
In determining whether to remove the individual's name from the caregiver
registry, the department shall consider the following information if reasonably
available: (1) The nature of the conduct that caused the person's name to be
placed on the caregiver registry; (2) the severity of harm in the original
investigated incident; (3) the conduct of the individual since the individual's
name was placed on the caregiver registry, including any treatment received,
criminal convictions, and employment history; (4) any disqualifying criminal
convictions; and (5) such other information as the department determines to be
relevant.

If the department
determines the individual's name can be removed from the caregiver registry,
the department shall immediately remove the individual's name. The
department's decision to grant an individual's petition for removal of findings
applies only to the caregiver registry and does not apply to any registry that
is maintained by the department in order to ensure receipt of federal funds.

The department shall
maintain records related to the petition for removal in accordance with state
government records retention requirements, however, such records may not be
disclosed, except to the individual who filed the petition, or under the order
of a Washington state superior court. Any disclosure of records made under
this section is subject to privacy, safety, and confidentiality protections
provided in laws related to vulnerable adults and public records.

If the department acted
in good faith and in accordance with established procedures when it removed an
individual's name from the caregiver registry, or when it allowed an individual
whose name is on the caregiver registry to work in a nursing home, boarding
home, or adult family home setting, it shall be immune from liability for the
future actions of the individual.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
4. A new section is added
to chapter 74.34 RCW to read as follows:

A caregiver registry
preliminary determination of abandonment, abuse, financial exploitation, or
neglect shall be sustained in an adjudicative proceeding if the presiding
officer finds it is supported by a preponderance of the evidence. The
presiding officer's decision must be rendered within one hundred twenty days of
the date the individual's hearing request was received by the office of
administrative hearings. However, if the presiding officer finds that
extenuating circumstances exist that will prevent the decision from being made
within the one hundred twenty-day time period, the presiding officer may extend
the deadline only as long as is reasonably necessary.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
5. A new section is added
to chapter 74.34 RCW to read as follows:

When the department
learns that any in-state or out-of-state program or agency, disciplining
authority, or court has taken an action that would prevent the individual from
being employed in the care of and having unsupervised access to vulnerable
adults in accordance with RCW 74.39A.050(8), the department shall place the
individual's name and other identifying information about the individual on the
caregiver registry and if appropriate, on any other registry that is maintained
by the department in order to ensure receipt of federal funds.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
6. A new section is added
to chapter 74.34 RCW to read as follows:

Subject to the
following conditions, the department shall disclose caregiver registry findings
of abuse, neglect, abandonment, and financial exploitation to: (1) Any
employer providing home and community services as defined in chapter 74.39A
RCW, including facilities licensed under chapters 18.51, 18.20, 70.127, and
70.128 RCW; (2) any employer of a program authorized under RCW 71A.12.040(10);
(3) any person who is employing, staffing, licensing, or contracting for the
provision of long-term care or protective services to a vulnerable adult; and
(4) the long-term care ombudsman. The person requesting such information must
provide the department with the individual's correct legal name, social
security number, gender, and date of birth. The department may request
additional information necessary to ensure the accurate identification of the
individual on the caregiver registry. The department shall not release an
individual's home address, social security number, or home telephone number.

Nothing in this act is
to be construed to prevent anyone from obtaining any information about
themselves that is in the possession of the department. The department may
withhold information regarding other persons as provided by law or when release
of such information could reasonably result in a violation or threat to any
person's privacy, health, or safety and such information is known by the
department.

The person requesting
caregiver registry findings shall use this information only for making
decisions regarding employment, staffing, contracting, or licensing, or the
provision of care or services to vulnerable adults or services authorized under
RCW 74.09.520 and 71A.12.040(10). Further dissemination or use of the findings
is prohibited.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
7. A new section is added
to chapter 74.39A RCW to read as follows:

An employer providing
home and community services, including facilities licensed under chapters
18.51, 18.20, and 70.128 RCW, an employer of a program authorized under RCW
71A.12.040(10), or an in-home services agency employer licensed under chapter
70.127 RCW, who discloses information about a former or current employee to a
prospective home and community services employer, nursing home employer, or
home health, hospice, or home care agency employer, is presumed to be acting in
good faith and is immune from civil and criminal liability for such disclosure
or its consequences if the disclosed information relates to: (1) The
employee's ability to perform his or her job; (2) the diligence, skill, or
reliability with which the employee carried out the duties of his or her job;
or (3) any illegal or wrongful act committed by the employee when related to
his or her ability to care for a vulnerable adult. For purposes of this
section, the presumption of good faith may only be rebutted upon a showing by
clear and convincing evidence that the information disclosed by the employer
was knowingly false or made with reckless disregard for the truth of the
information disclosed. Should the employee successfully rebut the presumption
of good faith standard in a court of competent jurisdiction, and therefore be
the prevailing party, the prevailing party shall be entitled to recover
reasonable attorneys' fees against the employer. Nothing in this section shall
affect or limit any other state, federal, or constitutional right otherwise
available.

Sec. 8. RCW 74.39A.050 and 2000
c 121 s 10 are each amended to read as follows:

The department's system
of quality improvement for long-term care services shall use the following
principles, consistent with applicable federal laws and regulations:

(1) The system shall be
client-centered and promote privacy, independence, dignity, choice, and a home
or home-like environment for consumers consistent with chapter 392, Laws of
1997.

(2) The goal of the
system is continuous quality improvement with the focus on consumer
satisfaction and outcomes for consumers. This includes that when conducting
licensing inspections, the department shall interview an appropriate percentage
of residents, family members, resident managers, and advocates in addition to
interviewing providers and staff.

(3) Providers should be
supported in their efforts to improve quality and address identified problems
initially through training, consultation, technical assistance, and case
management.

(4) The emphasis should
be on problem prevention both in monitoring and in screening potential
providers of service.

(5) Monitoring should
be outcome based and responsive to consumer complaints and a clear set of
health, quality of care, and safety standards that are easily understandable
and have been made available to providers.

(6) Prompt and specific
enforcement remedies shall also be implemented without delay, pursuant to RCW
74.39A.080, RCW 70.128.160, chapter 18.51 RCW, or chapter 74.42 RCW, for
providers found to have delivered care or failed to deliver care resulting in
problems that are serious, recurring, or uncorrected, or that create a hazard that
is causing or likely to cause death or serious harm to one or more residents.
These enforcement remedies may also include, when appropriate, reasonable
conditions on a contract or license. In the selection of remedies, the safety,
health, and well-being of residents shall be of paramount importance.

(7) To the extent
funding is available, all long-term care staff directly responsible for the
care, supervision, or treatment of vulnerable persons should be screened
through background checks in a uniform and timely manner to ensure that they do
not have a criminal history that would disqualify them from working with
vulnerable persons. Whenever a state conviction record check is required by
state law, persons may be employed or engaged as volunteers or independent
contractors on a conditional basis according to law and rules adopted by the
department.

(8) No provider or
staff, or prospective provider or staff, with a stipulated finding of fact,
conclusion of law, an agreed order, or finding of fact, conclusion of law, or
final order issued by a disciplining authority, a court of law, or entered into
a state registry ((finding him or her guilty)) with a finding of
abuse, neglect, financial exploitation, or abandonment of a minor or a
vulnerable adult as defined in chapter 74.34 RCW shall be employed in the care
of and have unsupervised access to vulnerable adults except as provided in
section 3 of this act.

(9) ((The department
shall establish, by rule, a state registry which contains identifying
information about personal care aides identified under this chapter who have
substantiated findings of abuse, neglect, financial exploitation, or
abandonment of a vulnerable adult as defined in RCW 74.34.020. The rule must
include disclosure, disposition of findings, notification, findings of fact,
appeal rights, and fair hearing requirements. The department shall disclose,
upon request, substantiated findings of abuse, neglect, financial exploitation,
or abandonment to any person so requesting this information.

(10))) The department shall by rule develop training
requirements for individual providers and home care agency providers.
Effective March 1, 2002, individual providers and home care agency providers
must satisfactorily complete department-approved orientation, basic training,
and continuing education within the time period specified by the department in
rule. The department shall adopt rules by March 1, 2002, for the
implementation of this section based on the recommendations of the community long-term
care training and education steering committee established in RCW 74.39A.190.
The department shall deny payment to an individual provider or a home care
provider who does not complete the training requirements within the time limit
specified by the department by rule.

(((11))) (10)
In an effort to improve access to training and education and reduce costs,
especially for rural communities, the coordinated system of long-term care
training and education must include the use of innovative types of learning
strategies such as internet resources, videotapes, and distance learning using
satellite technology coordinated through community colleges or other entities,
as defined by the department.

(((12))) (11)
The department shall create an approval system by March 1, 2002, for those
seeking to conduct department-approved training. In the rule-making process,
the department shall adopt rules based on the recommendations of the community
long-term care training and education steering committee established in RCW
74.39A.190.

(((13))) (12)
The department shall establish, by rule, training, background checks, and other
quality assurance requirements for personal aides who provide in-home services
funded by medicaid personal care as described in RCW 74.09.520, community
options program entry system waiver services as described in RCW 74.39A.030, or
chore services as described in RCW 74.39A.110 that are equivalent to
requirements for individual providers.

(((14))) (13)
Under existing funds the department shall establish internally a quality
improvement standards committee to monitor the development of standards and to
suggest modifications.

(((15)))
(14) Within existing funds, the department shall design, develop, and
implement a long-term care training program that is flexible, relevant, and
qualifies towards the requirements for a nursing assistant certificate as
established under chapter 18.88A RCW. This subsection does not require
completion of the nursing assistant certificate training program by providers
or their staff. The long-term care teaching curriculum must consist of a
fundamental module, or modules, and a range of other available relevant
training modules that provide the caregiver with appropriate options that
assist in meeting the resident's care needs. Some of the training modules may
include, but are not limited to, specific training on the special care needs of
persons with developmental disabilities, dementia, mental illness, and the care
needs of the elderly. No less than one training module must be dedicated to
workplace violence prevention. The nursing care quality assurance commission
shall work together with the department to develop the curriculum modules. The
nursing care quality assurance commission shall direct the nursing assistant
training programs to accept some or all of the skills and competencies from the
curriculum modules towards meeting the requirements for a nursing assistant
certificate as defined in chapter 18.88A RCW. A process may be developed to
test persons completing modules from a caregiver's class to verify that they
have the transferable skills and competencies for entry into a nursing
assistant training program. The department may review whether facilities can
develop their own related long-term care training programs. The department may
develop a review process for determining what previous experience and training
may be used to waive some or all of the mandatory training. The department of
social and health services and the nursing care quality assurance commission
shall work together to develop an implementation plan by December 12, 1998.

---
END ---