BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF
WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1. RCW 74.12.035 and 1999 c
120 s 2 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) Children over
eighteen years of age and under nineteen years of age who are full-time
students reasonably expected to complete a program of secondary school, or the
equivalent level of vocational or technical training, before reaching nineteen
years of age are eligible to receive temporary assistance for needy families:
PROVIDED HOWEVER, That if such students do not successfully complete such
program before reaching nineteen years of age, the assistance rendered under
this subsection during such period shall not be a debt due the state.

(2) Children with
disabilities who are eighteen years of age and under twenty-one years of age
and who are full-time students whose education is being provided in accordance
with RCW 28A.155.020 are eligible to receive temporary assistance for needy
families benefits.

(3) The department is
authorized to grant exceptions to the eligibility restrictions for children
eighteen years of age and under twenty-one years of age under subsections (1)
and (2) of this section only when it determines by reasonable, objective
criteria that such exceptions are likely to enable the children to complete
their high school education, general equivalency diploma or vocational
education.

(4)(a) After January
1, 2002, a new applicant for temporary assistance for needy families not
currently enrolled in an educational institution must have a high school
diploma, a general equivalency diploma, or have completed twelve years of
instruction at a public or private school. The new applicant will be
ineligible for temporary assistance for needy families for the five years
immediately following the applicant's last date of attendance at an educational
institution. If prior to the expiration of the five years, the new applicant
receives a diploma or general equivalency degree or completes twelve years of
instruction, he or she will be eligible to receive assistance.

(b) The requirements
in (a) of this subsection may be waived if the applicant received a waiver from
the local school board when he or she discontinued his or her education.
Waivers granted by the school board for the purposes of this subsection shall
only affect the student's eligibility for temporary assistance for needy
families program and shall not affect any other law related to school
attendance. A waiver shall be granted if a student is prevented from attending
school due to:

(i) An illness of
the student or of a family member that the student must care for;

(ii) The disability
of the student or child of the student; or

(iii)
Other extenuating circumstances as determined by the school board that would
prevent a student from continuing his or her education.

--- END ---