BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF
WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec.
1. A new section is added
to chapter 66.24 RCW to read as follows:

Upon
payment of an annual fee of one hundred twenty dollars to the liquor control
board, the holder of a spirits, beer, and wine restaurant license, and the
holder of a spirits, beer, and wine private club license, is allowed to sell
for off-premises consumption: (1) Wine vinted and bottled in the state of
Washington and carrying a label exclusive to the license holder selling the
wine; and (2) sparkling wine from California bottled exclusively for the
license holder selling the sparkling wine. Spirits and beer may not be sold
for off-premises consumption under this section.

--- END ---