BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF
WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec.
1. The secretary of state
shall create an initiative fiscal review committee and an initiative legal
review committee for each initiative. The secretary of state shall appoint the
members of each committee. The members of each committee must be citizens of
the United States and must be actual residents of this state. Each committee
must be organized at such time as the secretary deems appropriate, but each
committee shall review each initiative that qualifies for the ballot. Each
committee shall hold meetings at such times, places, and manners as the
secretary of state may designate.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
2. (1) The initiative fiscal
review committee will consist of the following persons as are determined to be
qualified, available, and have expertise in the policy area that is the subject
of the initiative: Two persons licensed to practice law in the state of
Washington, two persons experienced in analyzing fiscal impacts of legislation,
two persons who are professional economists, two persons employed in
occupations impacted by the initiative, two persons employed as professors by a
recognized college or university, two persons from recognized research
organizations who are considered experts in the subject matter, and two persons
who are members of the public. The fact that the secretary of state is unable
to fill each position on the committee does not prevent the committee from
performing its duty under this section so long as the secretary of state makes
a good-faith effort to fill each position with a person who is qualified and
available.

(2) The initiative
fiscal review committee shall determine, as well as possible, the short-term
and long-term effects of the initiative, including any disproportionate impacts
on particular public or private entities, the fiscal and economic costs of the
initiative, including the costs of compliance for public or private entities
required to comply with the proposed initiative, and if the initiative affects
the collection of a tax or fee used to fund general government, the rate or
amount of the tax or fee, or an exemption to the tax or fee.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
3. (1) The initiative legal
review committee will consist of the following persons as are determined to be
qualified, available, and have expertise in the policy area that is the subject
of the initiative: Two persons licensed to practice law in the state of
Washington, two persons experienced in analyzing the legal effects of
legislation, two persons employed as lawyers in organizations impacted by the
initiative, two persons employed as law professors by a recognized school of
law or university, two persons from recognized legal research organizations who
are considered experts in the subject matter, and two persons who are members
of the public. The fact that the secretary of state is unable to fill each
position on the committee does not prevent the committee from performing its
duty under this section so long as the secretary of state makes a good-faith
effort to fill each position with a person who is qualified and available.

(2) The initiative
legal review committee shall determine, as well as possible, the legality of
the initiative, including its impact on other laws and any other legal or
constitutional implications that may arise.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
4. The secretary of state
shall ensure that the membership of each committee reflects a fair-minded
balance of perspectives. The secretary shall also ensure that the report of
each committee is analytical, factual, objective, and impartial, is written in
clear and concise language, and that information, findings, conclusions, and
opinions regarding the effects, fiscal and economic costs, or legality of the
initiative are supported with specificity.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
5. (1) Each committee shall
issue a final report on its determinations. Each report is advisory only and
may include only such information, findings, conclusions, or opinions as all
members of the committee issuing the report agree to include in the report.
The secretary of state shall ensure that each committee completes and submits
its final report to the secretary in time to allow adequate opportunity for the
proponents, and opponents if any, of the initiative to include whatever
information, findings, conclusions, or opinions of the committee the proponents
or opponents may find appropriate in arguments prepared by them under RCW
29.81.240. A copy of each report must be made available to members of the
public upon request.

(2) The secretary of
state shall provide adequate notice in any voter pamphlet distributed under RCW
29.81.210, as appropriate, of the existence of an initiative fiscal review
committee report and initiative legal review committee report, a brief
description of the purpose of the report that may be no longer than twenty-five
words, that a copy of the report is available to members of the public upon
request, and where a copy of the report can be obtained.

(3)(a) For purposes of
the initiative legal review committee report, the voters' pamphlet must
include, in addition to the twenty‑five word description of the report,
one of the following statements, as appropriate:

(i) In the opinion of
the initiative legal review committee this initiative is constitutional.

(ii) In the opinion of
the initiative legal review committee this initiative is not constitutional.

(iii) In the opinion of
the initiative legal review committee it is not clear whether this initiative
is constitutional or not.

(b) For purposes of
this subsection (3), if all members of the committee issuing the report are
unable to agree on either statement (i), (ii), or (iii), the voters' pamphlet
must include statement (iii).

NEW SECTION. Sec.
6. When the initiative legal
review committee report is submitted to the secretary of state, the secretary
of state shall immediately provide a copy of the report to the proponents, and
opponents if any, of the initiative and any other person who has made written
request for the report. A person dissatisfied with the opinion of the
committee regarding the constitutionality of the initiative may appeal directly
to the supreme court for declaratory judgment on the issue within five days
after the date the report is completed and submitted to the secretary. The
appeal must be made by petition setting forth the initiative, the committee
report, and objections to the opinion of the committee regarding the
constitutionality of the initiative. The petition together with a notice that
an appeal has been taken must be served on the secretary of state, the attorney
general, and the proponents, and opponents if any, of the initiative. The
appeal must be considered an emergency matter of public concern, and must be
heard and determined with all convenient speed. The court shall examine the
initiative, the committee report, and the objections, and may hear arguments.
The court shall render its decision regarding the constitutionality of the
initiative, and the decision of the court is final and its opinion on the constitutionality
of the initiative is conclusive. The appeal must be heard without costs to the
petitioner.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
7. Members of the committee
may receive no compensation for their services, but are eligible to receive a
subsistence allowance and travel expenses under RCW 43.03.050 and 43.03.060.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
8. The secretary of state
and members of the review committees are immune from suit in any action based
on acts performed in good faith in the performance of their duties.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
9. The secretary of state
shall adopt rules necessary to implement sections 1 through 8 of this act.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 10. Sections 1 through 9 of
this act are added to chapter 29.79 RCW.

---
END ---