BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF
WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec.
1. A new section is added
to chapter 43.21C RCW to read as follows:

The legislature finds
that the flood plains of the state's rivers are a part of the river system and
have a significant function, in respect to channel movement and fish habitat,
which is especially important in light of the listings and potential listings
of fish as threatened or endangered under the federal endangered species act.
The legislature further finds that the potential impacts of surface mining on
the significant functions of flood plains are site-specific, consistently
requiring thorough environmental review of individual projects. The
legislature also finds that the state environmental policy act, rules adopted
to implement it, and other applicable environmental and land use laws prevent
unnecessary duplication of environmental review, appropriately assign
responsibilities among local governments and state agencies with regulatory
jurisdiction, and help to protect property and its value.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
2. A new section is added
to chapter 43.21C RCW to read as follows:

Except for metals
mining and milling operations subject to RCW 43.21C.039, and notwithstanding
any provision in RCW 43.21C.030 and 43.21C.031 to the contrary, an
environmental impact statement shall be prepared for any new or expanded public
or private surface mine when all or part of the proposed mine falls within a
flood plain as defined in WAC 173-22-030.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
3. A new section is added
to chapter 78.44 RCW to read as follows:

Except for metals
mining and milling operations subject to RCW 78.56.050, an environmental impact
statement must be prepared for any new or expanded public or private surface
mine when all or part of the proposed mine falls within a flood plain as
defined in WAC 173-22-030.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
4. A new section is added
to chapter 90.58 RCW to read as follows:

Surface
mining is prohibited in areas designated as conservancy in local shoreline
management plans.

---
END ---