BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF
WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec.
1. A new section is added
to chapter 71A.12 RCW to read as follows:

It is the
intent of the legislature to provide funding to the department in the biennial
operating budget to support young adults with developmental disabilities who
have become twenty-one years of age and exited special education. This funding
is specifically provided to assist young adults with developmental disabilities
to become either gainfully employed, or to participate in programs designed to
assist with gaining access to their communities, or both.

--- END ---