BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF
WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1. RCW 28B.10.350 and 2000
c 138 s 202 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) When the cost to
The Evergreen State College, any regional university, or state university, of
any building, construction, renovation, remodeling, or demolition other than
maintenance or repairs will equal or exceed the sum of ((twenty-five)) thirty-five
thousand dollars, complete plans and specifications for such work shall be
prepared and such work shall be put out for public bids and the contract shall
be awarded to the lowest responsible bidder if in accordance with the bid
specifications: PROVIDED, That when the estimated cost of such building,
construction, renovation, remodeling, or demolition equals or exceeds the sum
of twenty-five thousand dollars, such project shall be deemed a public works
and "the prevailing rate of wage," under chapter 39.12 RCW shall be
applicable thereto: PROVIDED FURTHER, That when such building, construction,
renovation, remodeling, or demolition involves one trade or craft area and the
estimated cost exceeds ((ten)) fifteen thousand dollars, complete
plans and specifications for such work shall be prepared and such work shall be
put out for public bids, and the contract shall be awarded to the lowest
responsible bidder if in accordance with the bid specifications. This
subsection shall not apply when a contract is awarded by the small works roster
procedure authorized in RCW 39.04.155 or under any other procedure authorized
for an institution of higher education.

(2) The Evergreen State
College, any regional university, or state university may require a project to
be put to public bid even when it is not required to do so under subsection (1)
of this section.

(3) Where the estimated
cost to The Evergreen State College, any regional university, or state
university of any building, construction, renovation, remodeling, or demolition
is less than twenty-five thousand dollars or the contract is awarded by the
small works roster procedure authorized in RCW 39.04.155, the publication
requirements of RCW 39.04.020 shall be inapplicable.

(4) In the
event of any emergency when the public interest or property of The Evergreen
State College, regional university, or state university would suffer material
injury or damage by delay, the president of such college or university may
declare the existence of such an emergency and reciting the facts constituting
the same may waive the requirements of this section with reference to any
contract in order to correct the condition causing the emergency: PROVIDED,
That an "emergency," for the purposes of this section, means a
condition likely to result in immediate physical injury to persons or to
property of such college or university in the absence of prompt remedial action
or a condition which immediately impairs the institution's ability to perform its
educational obligations.

--- END ---