BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF
WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1. RCW 41.06.022 and 1993 c
281 s 8 are each amended to read as follows:

For purposes of this
chapter, "manager" means any employee who:

(1) Formulates
statewide policy or directs the work of an agency or agency subdivision;

(2) Is responsible to
administer one or more statewide policies or programs of an agency ((or
agency subdivision;

(3) Manages,
administers, and controls a local branch office of an agency or agency
subdivision, including the physical, financial, or personnel resources)); and

(((4) Has
substantial responsibility in personnel administration, legislative relations,
public information, or the preparation and administration of budgets; or

(5))) (3) Functionally is above the first
level of supervision and exercises authority that is not merely routine or
clerical in nature and requires the consistent use of independent judgment;
or

(4) Has substantial
responsibility in personnel administration, legislative relations, public
information, or the preparation and administration of budgets.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
2. A new section is added
to chapter 41.06 RCW to read as follows:

No more
than ten percent of an agency's work force may be in the Washington management
service.

---
END ---