BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF
WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec.
1. A new section is added
to chapter 41.04 RCW to read as follows:

(1) Each state agency
shall, within available funds, develop and implement a quality management
program to improve the quality, efficiency, and effectiveness of the public
services it provides through business process redesign, employee involvement,
and other quality management techniques. Each agency shall ensure that front
line agency employees are engaged in the program and shall provide employees
with the training necessary to successful implementation of efforts toward
quality improvement.

(2) Each agency shall,
within available funds, ensure that its quality management program:

(a) Identifies
immediate-term and near-term opportunities to improve services and reduce
costs;

(b) Identifies goals
and utilizes strategic business planning and performance measures to establish
priorities and measure progress toward meeting them. Each state agency shall
develop performance measures to assess customer satisfaction, agency progress
toward accomplishing outcomes specified in the agency budget under RCW 43.88.090,
and the impact of initiatives instituted under the quality management program
as a whole;

(c) Reports the results
of its quality management program on a regular basis. Each agency shall ensure
that its report specifies improved outcomes for public service and efficiency.
Any agency in its report may describe methods of measuring customer and
stakeholder satisfaction, of engaging agency employees in the program, and of
assessing the extent to which business practices have been changed to improve quality,
efficiency, and effectiveness;

(d) Evaluates the
results of its quality, service, and management improvement programs and
assesses program effects upon leadership, information and analysis, strategic
planning, human resource development and management, process improvement,
business results, and customer focus and satisfaction;

(e) Develops a plan for
quality improvement, documenting efforts made up to the date of the report and
addressing all matters enumerated in this subsection.

(3) State agencies
under the supervision of the governor shall report program results to the
governor on a regular basis. State agencies under elected executive officials
other than the governor shall report program results to the elected executive
official on a regular basis.

(4) Each state agency
shall integrate efforts made under this section with quality management
programs undertaken under executive order or other authority. The office of
insurance commissioner, the department of natural resources, and four-year institutions
of higher education shall develop and implement a complete quality management
program by June 30, 2006. All other state agencies shall develop and implement
a complete quality management program by June 30, 2003.

(5) Starting in 2008
and at least once every three years thereafter, the office of insurance
commissioner, the department of natural resources, and four-year institutions
of higher education, or their subdivisions, or both, shall apply for the
governor's Washington state quality award program or equivalent, for potential
recognition. Starting in 2005 and at least once every three years thereafter,
all other state agencies or their subdivisions, or both, shall apply for the
governor's Washington state quality award program or equivalent, for potential
recognition. Every subdivision of a state agency with three thousand or more
full-time equivalent employees must complete an application in each four-year
period.

(6) For purposes of
this section, "state agency" includes every elected state executive
official and every department, division, board, commission, and institution of
the executive branch of state government, including institutions of higher
education, as defined in RCW 28B.10.016.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
2. A new section is added
to chapter 41.04 RCW to read as follows:

Both houses of the
legislature shall develop and implement quality improvement programs as
described under section 1 of this act by June 30, 2004, but shall report the
results of these efforts to the leadership of each major political party caucus
within its house.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
3. A new section is added
to chapter 41.04 RCW to read as follows:

The supreme court is
encouraged to develop and implement quality improvement programs, as described
under section 1 of this act, for the judicial branch of government, by June 30,
2004, but shall report the results of these efforts to the chief justice. The
programs may be implemented directly by the supreme court or may be delegated
to the administrator for the courts.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
4. A new section is added
to chapter 41.04 RCW to read as follows:

(1) Local governments
are encouraged to develop and implement quality management programs as set
forth in section 1 of this act.

(2) For
purposes of this section, "local government" includes every county,
city, town, special district, municipal corporation, and quasi-municipal
corporation in the state.

---
END ---