BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF
WASHINGTON:

_8 NEW SECTION. Sec. 1. The legislature finds
that:

_9 It is in the best interest of the state of
Washington to

10 promote private investment in many areas for the purpose
of

11 stimulating economic vitality and promoting economic
stability. In

12 many urban areas, urban decay, abandoned buildings, and

13 environmental contamination pose a barrier to
redevelopment.

14 Public investment is needed to reclaim brownfields,
update

15 infrastructure, and improve the condition of public
areas. In the

16 absence of public investment, urban redevelopment
projects often

17 cannot pay a return sufficient to attract private
investment. These

p. 1 SHB
1518

_1 urban areas need private investment to create employment

_2 opportunities and to generally improve the economic
stability of

_3 many neighborhoods.

_4 In other areas, the public infrastructure necessary
to attract

_5 new business or to facilitate the growth and expansion
of existing

_6 industry is inadequate. Industry expects that basic
infrastructure

_7 such as sewer, roads, power, natural gas, and telecommunications

_8 services will be available at potential industrial and
commercial

_9 sites. Private investment is necessary to diversify and
strengthen

10 many economies throughout the state; however the private
sector is

11 unlikely to invest in areas in which public
infrastructure is

12 lacking.

13 In 1999, the state of Washington local government

14 infrastructure study identified a gap in infrastructure
financing

15 well over three billion dollars. The legislature finds
that with

16 existing local resources, counties, cities, or Indian
tribes

17 cannot finance needed public infrastructure projects.
The

18 legislature further finds that a partnership between the
state,

19 and counties, cities, or Indian tribes, and private
industry can

20 make strategic investments in public infrastructure that
will

21 stimulate the private investment needed to spur economic

22 development and create jobs.

23 NEW SECTION. Sec. 2. A new section is
added to chapter 82.14

24 RCW to read as follows:

25 (1) A county, city, or Indian tribe that obtains
approval under

26 section 3 of this act shall receive a monthly
distribution from

27 the infrastructure improvement account, hereby created
in the

28 state treasury, subject to the limitations in this
section and

29 section 3 of this act. The distribution shall be equal
to the

30 proceeds from the state share of the sales tax and use
tax upon

31 taxable events under chapters 82.08 and 82.12 RCW,
within the

32 boundaries of the county or city, or within Indian
country of the

33 tribe, subject to the funding limitations in this
section. The

34 proceeds shall be from the state share of the sales and
use tax

35 from within the specific county, city, or Indian country
of the

36 tribe, and shall be deposited as directed in section 4
of this

37 act. For the purposes of the distribution under this
section,

SHB 1518 p. 2

_1 proceeds distributed to a tribe shall be based on
estimates of

_2 taxable events taking place in the tribal jurisdiction.
The

_3 department shall, in consultation with the tribe,
calculate the

_4 estimate and provide the information to the state
treasurer. No

_5 more than five hundred thousand dollars are available
for any one

_6 project in any fiscal year, and no one city, county, or
tribe may

_7 receive more than one million dollars in any fiscal
year.

_8 (2) The funding provided in this section shall
expire when the

_9 debt obligation for the infrastructure improvement
project, as

10 approved under section 3 of this act, is repaid, but in
no event

11 may the funding be received for more than twenty years
after the

12 first distribution under this section.

13 (3) The proceeds received under this section shall
be used for

14 the purpose of payments on the infrastructure
improvement project

15 debt obligations to cover infrastructure improvements
and related

16 infrastructure expenses. This revenue is the state's
share of the

17 debt obligation repayment, and it may not exceed thirty
percent of

18 the total public sector project budget. At least
seventy percent of

19 the funding must come from other public or private
sources.

20 (4) The definitions in this subsection apply to this
section

21 and sections 3 and 4 of this act.

22 (a) "Indian country" has the meaning given
in RCW 82.24.010.

23 (b) "Indian tribe" means an Indian nation,
tribe, band,

24 community, or other entity recognized as a federally
recognized

25 Indian tribe by the United States department of the
interior.

26 (c) "Infrastructure improvements" means
the construction,

27 renovation, or expansion of publicly owned
infrastructure

28 improvements such as dock facilities, park and
recreation

29 facilities and areas, parking facilities, public transit

30 facilities, sewer systems, sidewalks, lighting, and
pedestrian

31 improvements and amenities, telecommunications systems,
water

32 systems, and wastewater systems, including demolition
and clean-up

33 activities related to the improvements.

34 (d) "Private partner" does not include any
government or any

35 government enterprise, corporation, or other similar
entity.

36 (e) "Related infrastructure expenses"
includes expenditures for

37 activities such as design, planning, environmental
analysis, land

38 and materials acquisition, and site preparation, as well
as

p. 3 SHB
1518

_1 expenditures for the financing of the infrastructure
improvement,

_2 such as legal fees, insurance fees, financing fees,
principal and

_3 interest costs on general indebtedness including
reserves, and

_4 administrative costs.

_5 NEW SECTION. Sec. 3. A new section is
added to chapter 82.14

_6 RCW to read as follows:

_7 (1) The department of community, trade, and economic

_8 development shall review and approve or deny
applications from

_9 counties, cities, or Indian tribes for infrastructure
improvement

10 projects, consistent with the criteria in this section.
Counties,

11 cities, and tribes may develop proposals with other government

12 entities such as port districts, special purpose
districts,

13 municipal corporations, and public development
authorities, but

14 the county, city, or tribe remains the only entity
eligible under

15 this section and section 2 of this act. Applications
shall be in a

16 form and manner as required by the department of
community, trade,

17 and economic development. Funding is available on a
first-come

18 basis, with priority based on the date and time an
application is

19 received. In the event that a subsequent application is
received

20 from a taxing jurisdiction that has overlapping
jurisdiction with

21 a jurisdiction with a priority application, the
subsequent

22 application shall be approved only if there are
sufficient

23 revenues expected to be generated to cover the state's
share of

24 the project. All qualifying projects shall be funded
until the

25 fiscal funding cap is met. At the point the fiscal
funding cap is

26 reached, no proposals may be evaluated until the
following fiscal

27 year. Applications denied due to the program funding
cap being met

28 must be resubmitted the following fiscal year in order
to be

29 reconsidered. The department of community, trade, and
economic

30 development shall provide a response to a proposal
within sixty

31 days of receipt.

32 (a) During each fiscal year, the department of
community,

33 trade, and economic development may approve no more than
one

34 million dollars in new projects for each fiscal year.

35 (b) A county, city, or Indian tribe may have no more
than two

36 ongoing infrastructure improvement projects at any one
time and

37 may not be approved for more than one project in any one
year.

SHB 1518 p. 4

_1 (c) The funds received under section 3 of this act
may not

_2 exceed five hundred thousand dollars for any one project
per year.

_3 (2) A county, city, or Indian tribe may finance
infrastructure

_4 improvements and related infrastructure expenses in part
by using

_5 tax revenue dedicated under section 4 of this act,
subject to

_6 providing the department of community, trade, and
economic

_7 development with documentation regarding the following
conditions

_8 and requirements:

_9 (a) The county, city, or Indian tribe must certify
to the

10 department that an analysis has been made of the value
to the

11 state of the private portion of the project, and that
over a

12 thirty-year term the projected state revenue, such as
sales and

13 use tax and business and occupation tax, from all state
taxes

14 directly associated with the private portion of the
project will

15 at least equal the dollar value of the state's funding
of the

16 project;

17 (b) The county, city, or Indian tribe must identify
the source

18 of funds through which it will fund its share of the

19 infrastructure improvement project;

20 (c) The county, city, or Indian tribe must have
received an

21 agreement in writing from a private entity committing to
a

22 privately funded private project that will directly
benefit from

23 the infrastructure improvements and must provide a copy
of such

24 agreement to the department; and

25 (d) A project proposed by a county or city must be
consistent

26 with the comprehensive plan and development regulations
it has

27 adopted in conformance with chapter 36.70A RCW.

28 (3) The department of community, trade, and economic

29 development may give an approval conditioned on the
county, city,

30 or Indian tribe satisfying the conditions and
requirements in this

31 section, but in no circumstances may funds be received
under

32 section 2 of this act before the conditions in
subsection (2) of

33 this section are satisfied, at which point final
approval may be

34 given. Upon final approval under this section, the department
of

35 community, trade, and economic development shall notify
the

36 applicant and the department of revenue.

37 (4) No projects may be approved under this section
after June

38 30, 2006.

p. 5 SHB
1518

_1

_2 NEW SECTION. Sec. 4. A new section is
added to chapter 82.32

_3 RCW to read as follows:

_4 The department shall deposit into the infrastructure

_5 improvement account, created in section 2 of this act,
all

_6 proceeds from the state share of the sales tax and use
tax upon

_7 taxable events, for those counties, cities, or Indian
tribes that

_8 have been approved under section 3 of this act. The
proceeds shall

_9 be from the state share of the sales and use tax from
within the

10 specific county, city, or Indian country of the tribe.
Pursuant to

11 section 2 of this act, no more than five hundred
thousand dollars

12 shall be for any one project in any fiscal year, and any
one

13 jurisdiction may receive not more than one million
dollars in any

14 fiscal year. If the department has received notice of
final

15 approval from the department of community, trade, and
economic

16 development under section 3(3) of this act and the sale
of bonds

17 or other debt instruments is complete, the department
shall notify

18 the state treasurer regarding the monthly distributions
under

19 section 2(1) of this act.

20 NEW SECTION. Sec. 5. The state incurs no
obligation or

21 liability regarding an infrastructure improvement
project under

22 section 3 of this act, other than the funding provided
through the

23 sales and use tax under section 2 of this act.

24 NEW SECTION. Sec. 6. If any provision of
this act or its

25 application to any person or circumstance is held
invalid, the

26 remainder of the act or the application of the provision
to other

27 persons or circumstances is not affected.

‑‑‑ END ‑‑‑

SHB 1518 p. 6