BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF
WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec.
1. The legislature finds and
declares that access to dental care is severely hampered by a critical and
emergent shortage of dental providers in Washington state. Dental disease is
an epidemic among poor children, the elderly, the disabled, and anyone who does
not have access to adequate dental care. Dental decay is worsening among
children under four years of age, with forty-one percent of the state's
Headstart children needing treatment for dental decay. One-third of the
dentists in this state are over fifty-five years old, and forty-five percent of
dentists in Yakima county are planning to retire in the next five years. The
lack of qualified dentists poses a serious and compelling threat to the oral
health of the people of this state.

Shortages are also due
to licensing restrictions that have discouraged qualified dentists from coming
into this state. The legislature finds that there is a great resource of
dentists in the military whose retirement from duty offers untapped opportunity
to continue their practice as civilians. Increasing the number of dentists
from other states and from military installations would enable retiring
dentists in this state to sell their practices to other qualified
practitioners. The legislature intends to improve access to dental care in
this state by increasing the number of dentists willing to work in underserved
areas, as well as to assure their availability to every resident of the state.

Sec. 2. RCW 18.32.215 and 1994
sp.s. c 9 s 219 are each amended to read as follows:

An applicant holding a
valid license and currently engaged in practice in another state may be granted
a license without examination required by this chapter, on the payment of any
required fees, if the commission determines that the other state's licensing
standards are ((substantively)) substantially equivalent to the
standards in this state and the applicant is a graduate of an approved
dental school. The commission may also require the applicant to: (1) File
with the commission documentation certifying the applicant is licensed to
practice in another state; and (2) provide information as the commission deems
necessary pertaining to the conditions and criteria of the Uniform Disciplinary
Act, chapter 18.130 RCW, and to demonstrate to the commission a knowledge of
Washington law pertaining to the practice of dentistry.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
3. A new section is added
to chapter 18.32 RCW to read as follows:

An applicant holding a
valid license currently engaged in practice in another state may be granted a
license without examination required by this chapter, on payment of the
required fees, if the commission determines that the applicant is a graduate of
an approved dental school and conditions his or her practice in a critical
needs area, as defined by the secretary considering federal guidelines for
serving patients in underserved areas. After completing three years of
practice in a critical needs area, the applicant may be granted a license
without examination to practice anywhere in this state. The commission may
also require the applicant to: (1) File with the commission documentation
certifying the applicant is licensed to practice in another state; and (2)
provide information as the commission deems necessary pertaining to the
conditions and criteria of the Uniform Disciplinary Act, chapter 18.130 RCW,
and to demonstrate to the commission a knowledge of Washington law pertaining
to the practice of dentistry.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
4. A new section is added
to chapter 18.32 RCW to read as follows:

An
applicant holding a valid license and currently engaged as a dentist in military
service in any state may be granted a license without examination required by
this chapter, on payment of the required fees, if the commission determines
that the applicant is a graduate of an approved dental school. The commission
may also require the applicant to: (1) File with the commission documentation
certifying the applicant is licensed to practice in another state; and (2)
provide information as the commission deems necessary pertaining to the
conditions and criteria of the Uniform Disciplinary Act, chapter 18.130 RCW,
and to demonstrate to the commission a knowledge of Washington law pertaining
to the practice of dentistry.

---
END ---