BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF
WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec.
1. The legislature finds
that, although family leave laws have assisted individuals to balance the
demands of the workplace with their family responsibilities, more needs to be
done to achieve the goals of work force stability and economic security. In
particular, the legislature finds that many individuals do not have access to
family leave laws, and those who do may not be in a financial position to take
family leave that is unpaid, and that employer-paid benefits, including family
leave and disability benefits, meet only a relatively small part of this need.
The legislature declares it to be in the public interest to establish a program
that: (1) Provides additional options for individuals to use in balancing work
and family responsibilities; (2) is in addition to those programs offered by
employers; (3) provides limited income support for a reasonable period while an
individual is away from work on family leave; and (4) reduces the impact on
state income-support programs by increasing an individual's ability to provide
care-giving services for family members while maintaining an employment
relationship.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
2. The definitions in this
section apply throughout this chapter unless the context clearly requires
otherwise.

(1) "Application
year" means the twelve-month period beginning on the first day of the
calendar week in which an individual files an application for family leave
insurance benefits and, thereafter, the twelve-month period beginning with the
first day of the calendar week in which the individual next files an
application for family leave insurance benefits after the expiration of the
individual's last preceding application year.

(2) "Calendar
quarter" means the same as the definition in RCW 50.04.050.

(3) "Child"
means a person who is:

(a) A biological,
adopted, or foster child, a stepchild, a legal ward, or a child of a person
standing in loco parentis; and

(b)(i) Under eighteen
years of age; or

(ii) Eighteen years of
age or older and incapable of self-care because of a mental or physical
disability.

(4)
"Department" means the department of labor and industries.

(5)
"Director" means the director of the department of labor and
industries.

(6) "Employer"
means: (a) The same as the definition in RCW 50.04.080; and (b) the state and
its political subdivisions.

(7)
"Employment" means the same as the definition in RCW 50.04.100.

(8) "Family
leave" means leave from employment:

(a) To care for a
newborn child or adopted or foster child of the individual when leave is
completed within twelve months after the birth or the placement for adoption or
foster care, as applicable;

(b) To care for the
individual's family member who has a serious health condition; or

(c) Because of the
individual's serious health condition that makes the individual unable to
perform the functions of the individual's position.

(9) "Family leave
insurance benefits" means the benefits payable under sections 7 and 8 of
this act.

(10) "Family
member" means a child, spouse, or the parent of the individual or
individual's spouse.

(11) "Health care
provider" means a person licensed as a physician under chapter 18.71 RCW
or an osteopathic physician and surgeon under chapter 18.57 RCW.

(12) "Parent"
means a biological or adoptive parent, a stepparent, or an individual who stood
in loco parentis to an individual or an individual's spouse when the individual
or individual's spouse was a child.

(13)
"Premium" and/or "premiums" means taxes, which are the
money payments required by this chapter to be made to the department for the
family leave insurance account under section 23 of this act.

(14) "Qualifying
year" means the first four of the last five completed calendar quarters or
the last four completed calendar quarters immediately preceding the first day
of the individual's application year.

(15) "Regularly
working" means the average number of hours per work week that an
individual worked in the last completed calendar quarter.

(16) "Serious
health condition" means an illness, injury, impairment, or physical or
mental condition that involves inpatient care in a hospital, hospice, or
residential medical care facility, or continuing treatment by a health care
provider.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
3. (1) The department shall
establish and administer a family leave insurance program and pay family leave
insurance benefits as specified in this chapter.

(2) The department
shall establish procedures and forms for filing claims for benefits under this
chapter. The department shall notify the employer within two business days of
a claim being filed under section 4 of this act.

(3) The department may
require that a claim for benefits under this chapter be supported by a certification
issued by the health care provider providing health care to the individual or
individual's family member, as applicable.

(4) Information
contained in the files and records pertaining to an individual under this
chapter are confidential and not open to public inspection, other than to
public employees in the performance of their official duties. However, the
individual or an authorized representative of an individual may review the
records or receive specific information from the records on the presentation of
the signed authorization of the individual. An employer or the employer's duly
authorized representative may review the records of an individual employed by
the employer in connection with a pending claim. At the department's discretion,
other persons may review records when such persons are rendering assistance to
the department at any stage of the proceedings on any matter pertaining to the
administration of this chapter.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
4. Family leave insurance
benefits are payable to an individual during a period in which the individual
is on unpaid family leave if the individual:

(1) Files a claim for
benefits as required by rules adopted by the director;

(2) Has been employed
for at least five hundred twenty hours in employment during the individual's
qualifying year;

(3) Establishes an
application year. An application year may not be established if the qualifying
year includes hours worked before establishment of a previous application year;

(4) Consents to the
disclosure of information or records deemed private and confidential under
chapter 50.13 RCW. Initial disclosure of this information and these records by
the employment security department to the department is solely for purposes
related to the administration of this chapter. Further disclosure of this
information or these records is subject to sections 3(4) and 14(2)(b) of this
act;

(5) Discloses whether
or not he or she owes child support obligations as defined in RCW 50.40.050;
and

(6) Documents that he
or she has provided the employer from whom family leave is to be taken with
written notice of the individual's intention to take family leave as follows:

(a) If the necessity
for family leave defined in section 2(8)(a) of this act was foreseeable based
on an expected birth or placement, notice was given at least thirty days before
the family leave was to begin, stating the anticipated starting date and ending
date of the family leave. However, if the date of birth or placement required
family leave to begin in less than thirty days, as much notice as practicable
was given; and

(b) If the necessity
for family leave defined in section 2(8) (b) or (c) of this act was foreseeable
based on planned medical treatment:

(i) Notice was given at
least thirty days before the family leave was to begin, stating the anticipated
starting date and ending date of the family leave. However, if the date of the
treatment required family leave to begin in less than thirty days, as much
notice as practicable was given; and

(ii) The individual
made reasonable efforts to schedule the treatment so as not to disrupt unduly
the operations of the employer, subject to the approval of the health care
provider of the individual or family member, as applicable.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
5. An individual is not
disqualified for family leave insurance benefits for any week with respect to
which the department finds that there is a strike or lockout at the factory,
establishment, or other premises at which the individual is or was last
employed.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
6. An individual is
disqualified from family leave insurance benefits beginning with the first day
of the calendar week, and continuing for the next fifty-two consecutive weeks,
in which the individual:

(1) Willfully made a
false statement or misrepresentation regarding a material fact, or willfully
failed to report a material fact, to obtain benefits under this chapter; or

(2) With respect to
family leave defined in section 2(8)(c) of this act is suffering from:

(a) A willful and
intentional self-inflicted serious health condition; or

(b) A serious health
condition resulting from the individual's perpetration of a gross misdemeanor
or felony.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
7. (1) The maximum number of
weeks during which family leave insurance benefits are payable in an
application year is five weeks. However, benefits are not payable for the
first five work days of family leave taken in an application year with respect
to a particular type of family leave, whether the family leave is employer paid
or unpaid.

(2)(a) The first
payment of benefits must be made to an individual within two weeks after the
claim is filed or the family leave began, whichever is later, and subsequent
payments must be made bimonthly thereafter.

(b) If an individual
dies before he or she receives a payment of benefits, the payment shall be made
to the surviving spouse or the child or children if there is no surviving
spouse. If there is no surviving spouse and no child or children, the payment
shall be made by the department and distributed consistent with the terms of
the decedent's will or, if the decedent dies intestate, consistent with the
terms of RCW 11.04.015.

(3) Benefits are not
payable and waiting period credits are not earned under this chapter for any
weeks in which compensation is paid or payable to the individual under Title 50
RCW or similar law of another state or the United States, or under RCW
51.32.060 or 51.32.090 or another state or federal workers' compensation law.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
8. Family leave insurance
benefits shall be paid as follows:

(1) For family leave
beginning before January 1, 2003, benefits shall be two hundred fifty dollars
per week for an individual who at the time of beginning family leave was
regularly working forty hours or more per week or a prorated amount based on
the weekly hours regularly worked for an individual regularly working less than
forty hours per week. By December 31, 2003, and by each subsequent December
31st, the department shall calculate to the nearest dollar an adjusted maximum
benefit to account for inflation using the consumer price index for urban wage
earners and clerical workers, CPI-W, or a successor index, for the twelve
completed calendar months before each December 31st as calculated by the United
States department of labor. The adjusted maximum benefit takes effect for
family leave beginning after the relevant December 31st.

(2) If an individual
who at the time of beginning family leave was regularly working forty hours or
more per week is on family leave for less than forty hours but at least eight
hours in a week, the individual's weekly payment shall be .025 times the
maximum benefit times the number of hours of family leave taken in the week.
Benefits are not payable for less than eight hours of family leave taken in a
week.

(3) If an individual
discloses that he or she owes child support obligations under section 4 of this
act and the department determines that the individual is eligible for benefits,
the department shall notify the applicable state or local child support
enforcement agency and deduct and withhold an amount from benefits in a manner
consistent with RCW 50.40.050.

(4) If an individual
elects to have federal income tax deducted and withheld from benefits, the
department shall deduct and withhold the amount specified in the federal
internal revenue code in a manner consistent with section 10 of this act.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
9. (1) Nothing in this
chapter is to be construed to limit an individual's right to leave from
employment under other laws or employer policy, as applicable, except as
provided in this chapter.

(2) If an employer
provides paid family leave or an individual has purchased disability insurance,
the individual may elect whether first to use the paid family leave or to
receive family leave insurance benefits under this chapter. An individual may
not be required to use the individual's paid family leave to which the
individual is otherwise entitled before receiving benefits under this chapter.

(3)(a) An employer may
require that family leave for which an individual is receiving or received
benefits under this chapter be taken concurrently with leave under the federal
family and medical leave act of 1993 (Act Feb. 5, 1993, P.L. 103-3, 107 Stat.
6), chapter 49.78 RCW, or other applicable federal, state, or local law, except
that:

(i) Family leave taken
for sickness or temporary disability because of pregnancy or childbirth is in
addition to leave under the federal family and medical leave act of 1993 (Act
Feb. 5, 1993, P.L. 103-3, 107 Stat. 6), chapter 49.78 RCW, or other applicable
federal, state, or local law.

(ii) Family leave
during which the individual is receiving or received benefits under this
chapter is in addition to leave from employment during which benefits are paid
or are payable under Title 51 RCW or a similar federal or state workers'
compensation law and that is designated as leave under the federal family and
medical leave act of 1993.

(b) If an employer
requires that family leave for which an individual is receiving or received
benefits under this chapter be taken concurrently with leave under the federal
family and medical leave act, chapter 49.78 RCW, or other applicable federal,
state, or local law, the employer must give all individuals in its employ
written notice of the requirement.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
10. (1) The department must
advise an individual filing a new claim for family leave insurance benefits, at
the time of filing such claim, that:

(a) Benefits are
subject to federal income tax;

(b) Requirements exist
pertaining to estimated tax payments;

(c) The individual may
elect to have federal income tax deducted and withheld from the individual's
payment of benefits at the amount specified in the federal internal revenue
code; and

(d) The individual is
permitted to change a previously elected withholding status.

(2) Amounts deducted
and withheld from benefits must remain in the family leave insurance account
until transferred to the federal taxing authority as a payment of income tax.

(3) The director shall
follow all procedures specified by the federal internal revenue service
pertaining to the deducting and withholding of income tax.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
11. If family leave insurance
benefits are paid erroneously or as a result of fraud, or if a claim for family
leave benefits is rejected after benefits are paid, RCW 51.32.240 shall apply,
except that appeals are governed by section 15 of this act, and the department
shall seek repayment of benefits from the recipient.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
12. (1) The right of an
individual who receives family leave insurance benefits under this chapter to
be returned to his or her position at the established ending date of family
leave is governed by RCW 49.78.070. However, this entitlement is supplementary
to a federal, state, or local law establishing a similar entitlement, and if a
federal, state, or local law applying to the individual establishes a more
favorable right to return to his or her position than is established under this
section, the application of that federal, state, or local law is not affected
by this section.

(2) An individual who
has received benefits under this chapter shall not lose any employment benefit,
including seniority or pension rights, accrued before the date that family
leave commenced. However, this chapter does not entitle an individual to
accrue employment benefits during a period of family leave or to a right,
benefit, or position of employment other than a right, benefit, or position to
which the individual would have been entitled had the individual not taken
family leave.

(3) This section shall
be enforced as provided in RCW 49.78.005(2)(b).

NEW SECTION. Sec.
13. (1) An employer of
individuals not covered by this chapter or a self-employed person, including a
sole proprietor, partner, or joint venturer, may elect coverage under the
family leave insurance program for all individuals in its employ for an initial
period of not less than three years or a subsequent period of not less than one
year immediately following another period of coverage. The employer or
self-employed person must file a notice of election in writing with the
director, as required by the department. The election becomes effective on the
date of filing the notice.

(2) An employer or
self-employed person who has elected coverage may withdraw from coverage within
thirty days after the end of the three-year period of coverage, or at such
other times as the director may prescribe by rule, by filing written notice
with the director, such withdrawal to take effect not sooner than thirty days
after the filing of the notice.

(3) The department may
cancel elective coverage if the employer or self-employed person fails to make
required payments or reports. The department may collect due and unpaid
premiums and may levy an additional premium for the remainder of the period of
coverage. The cancellation shall be effective no later than thirty days from
the date of the notice in writing advising the employer or self-employed person
of the cancellation.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
14. (1) In the form and at
the times specified by the director, an employer shall make reports, furnish
information, and remit premiums as required by section 21 of this act to the
department. If the employer is a temporary help company that provides
employees on a temporary basis to its customers, the temporary help company is
considered the employer for purposes of this section. However, if the
temporary help company fails to remit the required premiums, the customer to
whom the employees were provided is liable for paying the premiums.

(2)(a) An employer must
keep at his or her place of business a record of employment from which the
information needed by the department for purposes of this chapter may be
obtained. This record shall at all times be open to the inspection of the
director or department employees designated by the director.

(b) Information
obtained from employer records under this chapter is confidential and not open
to public inspection, other than to public employees in the performance of
their official duties. However, an interested party shall be supplied with
information from employer records to the extent necessary for the proper
presentation of the case in question. An employer may authorize inspection of
its records by written consent.

(3) An employer is
subject to the provisions of Title 51 RCW relating to the assessment and
collection of industrial insurance premiums, including but not limited to
penalties, interest, and department lien rights and collection remedies if the
employer:

(a) Fails to make the
required reports, or fails to remit the full amount of the premiums when due;
or

(b) Willfully makes a
false statement or misrepresentation regarding a material fact, or willfully
fails to report a material fact, to avoid making the required reports or
remitting the full amount of the premiums when due.

(4) Notwithstanding
subsection (3) of this section, appeals are governed by section 15 of this act.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
15. (1) A person aggrieved by
a decision of the department under this chapter must file a notice of appeal
with the director, by mail or personally, within thirty days after the date on
which a copy of the department's decision was communicated to the person. Upon
receipt of the notice of appeal, the director shall request the assignment of
an administrative law judge in accordance with chapter 34.05 RCW to conduct a
hearing and issue a proposed decision and order. The hearing shall be
conducted in accordance with chapter 34.05 RCW.

(2) The administrative
law judge's proposed decision and order shall be final and not subject to
further appeal unless, within thirty days of notice of the decision being
communicated to the interested parties, a party petitions for review by the
director. If the director's review is timely requested, the director may order
additional evidence by the administrative law judge. On the basis of the
evidence before the administrative law judge and such additional evidence as
the director may order to be taken, the director shall render a decision
affirming, modifying, or setting aside the administrative law judge's decision.
The director's decision becomes final and not subject to further appeal unless,
within thirty days after the decision is communicated to the interested
parties, a party files a petition for judicial review as provided in chapter
34.05 RCW. The director is a party to any judicial action involving the
director's decision and shall be represented in the action by the attorney
general.

(3) If an appeal
involves the right of an individual to family leave insurance benefits under
this chapter, the parties shall be afforded an opportunity for hearing within
seven days of the appeal being filed with the director.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
16. If, upon administrative
or judicial review, the decision of the department is reversed or modified, the
administrative law judge or the court in its discretion may award reasonable
attorneys' fees and costs to the prevailing party. Attorneys' fees and costs
owed by the department, if any, are payable out of the family leave insurance
account.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
17. An employer, temporary
help company, employment agency, employee organization, or other person may not
discharge, expel, or otherwise discriminate against a person because he or she
has filed or communicated to the employer an intent to file a claim, a
complaint, or an appeal, or has testified or is about to testify or has
assisted in any proceeding under this chapter. This section shall be enforced
as provided in RCW 51.48.025.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
18. (1) This chapter is not
intended to discourage employers from adopting or retaining policies that
provide additional benefits to individuals to address family leave needs.

(2) This chapter is not
to be construed to diminish an employer's obligation to comply with a
collective bargaining agreement or an employment benefit program or plan that
provides greater benefits to individuals than the family leave insurance
benefits provided under this chapter.

(3) An agreement by an
individual to waive his or her rights under this chapter is void as against
public policy.

(4) The benefits
provided to individuals under this chapter may not be diminished by a
collective bargaining agreement or an employment benefit program or plan
entered into or renewed after the effective date of this section.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
19. (1) Family leave
insurance benefits are payable under this chapter only to the extent provided
in sections 7 and 8 of this act and only to the extent that moneys are
available in the family leave insurance account for this purpose. Neither the
state nor the department is liable for any amount in excess of these limits.

(2) This chapter does
not create a continuing entitlement or contractual right. The legislature
reserves the right to amend or repeal all or part of this chapter at any time,
and a benefit or other right granted under this chapter exists subject to the
legislature's power to amend or repeal this chapter. There is no vested
private right of any kind against such amendment or repeal.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
20. The director may adopt
rules as necessary to implement this chapter. In adopting rules, the director
shall maintain consistency with the rules adopted to implement the federal
family and medical leave act of 1993 (Act Feb. 5, 1993, P.L. 103-3, 107 Stat.
6), to the extent such rules are not in conflict with this chapter.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
21. (1)(a) Except as provided
in this section, each employer shall retain from the earnings of each
individual a premium of one cent per hour worked, up to a maximum of forty
hours per week. The employer shall match the amount retained by an equal
amount, and the money retained shall be paid to the department in the manner
and at such intervals as the department directs for deposit in the family leave
insurance account. In the payment of premiums, a fractional part of a cent
shall be disregarded unless it amounts to one-half cent or more, in which case
it shall be increased to one cent.

(b) The director shall
adjust the amount of the premium from time to time to ensure that the amount is
the lowest rate necessary to pay family leave insurance benefits and
administrative costs, and maintain actuarial solvency in accordance with
recognized insurance principles, of the family leave insurance program.

(2) The state
apprenticeship council shall pay the entire amount required to be remitted for
the family leave insurance account to the department for registered apprentices
or trainees during their participation in supplemental and related instruction
classes.

(3) None of the amount
assessed for the family leave insurance account may be retained from the
earnings of individuals covered under RCW 51.16.210.

(4) The department may
adopt rules to permit an individual with multiple employers and their employers
to petition for refunds or credits of amounts paid to the department for hours
in excess of forty hours per week worked by the individual.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
22. (1) When an employer
quits business, or sells out, exchanges, or otherwise disposes of the
employer's business or stock of goods, any premium payable under this chapter
is immediately due and payable, and the employer must, within ten days
thereafter, make a return and pay the premium due. Any person who becomes a
successor to the business is liable for the full amount of the premium and must
withhold from the purchase price a sum sufficient to pay any premium due from
the employer until the employer produces a receipt from the department showing
payment in full of any premium due or a certificate that no premium is due and,
if the premium is not paid by the employer within ten days from the date of the
sale, exchange, or disposal, the successor is liable for the payment of the
full amount of premium. The successor's payment thereof is, to the extent
thereof, a payment upon the purchase price, and if the payment is greater in
amount than the purchase price, the amount of the difference is a debt due the
successor from the employer.

(2) A successor is not
liable for any premium due from the person from whom the successor has acquired
a business or stock of goods if the successor gives written notice to the department
of the acquisition and no assessment is issued by the department within one
hundred eighty days of receipt of the notice against the former operator of the
business and a copy thereof mailed to the successor.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
23. The family leave
insurance account is created in the custody of the state treasurer. All
receipts from the premium imposed under section 21 of this act or the penalties
imposed under section 14 of this act must be deposited in the account. Expenditures
from the account may be used only for the purposes of the family leave
insurance program. Only the director or the director's designee may authorize
expenditures from the account. The account is subject to the allotment
procedures under chapter 43.88 RCW, but an appropriation is not required for
benefit payments.

Sec. 24. RCW 49.78.005 and 1997 c
16 s 1 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) Except as provided
in subsection (2) of this section, the department shall cease to administer and
enforce this chapter beginning on July 27, 1997, and until the earlier of the
following dates:

(a) The effective date
of the repeal of the federal family and medical leave act of 1993 (Act Feb. 5,
1993, P.L. 103-3, 107 Stat. 6); or

(b) July 1st of the
year following the year in which amendments to the federal family and medical
leave act of 1993 (Act Feb. 5, 1993, P.L. 103-3, 107 Stat. 6) take effect that
provide less family leave than is provided under RCW 49.78.030. In determining
whether the federal law provides the same or more leave, the department shall
only consider whether (i) the total period of leave allowed under the amended
federal law is twelve or more workweeks in a twenty-four month period, and (ii)
the types of leave authorized under the amended federal law are similar to the
types authorized ((in this chapter)) under RCW 49.78.030.

(2)(a) The following
provisions of this chapter are in effect:

(i) An
employee's right under RCW 49.78.070(1)(b) to be returned to a workplace within
twenty miles of the employee's workplace when leave commenced ((shall remain
in effect.));

(ii) An individual's
right under section 12 of this act as described in RCW 49.78.070; and

(iii) An employee's
entitlement to leave for sickness or temporary disability because of pregnancy
or childbirth in addition to the family leave required by 29 U.S.C.
((29.2612)) Sec. 2612(a)(1)(A) and (B) of the federal family and
medical leave act of 1993 (Act Feb. 5, 1993, P.L. 103-3, 107 Stat. 6) ((shall
be in addition to any leave for sickness or temporary disability because of
pregnancy or childbirth)).

(b) The
department shall enforce this subsection under RCW 49.78.140 through 49.78.190,
except that an initial notice of infraction shall state that the employer has
thirty days in which to take corrective action. No infraction or penalty may
be assessed if the employer complies with the requirements of the initial
notice of infraction.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
25. The sum of
. . . . . dollars, or as much thereof as may be necessary,
is appropriated for the biennium ending June 30, 2003, from the medical aid
fund and the accident fund, in equal amounts, to the department of labor and
industries for the purposes of administering the family leave insurance program
under this act. This sum shall be repaid to the medical aid and accident funds
from the family leave insurance account by June 30, 2013.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
26. Sections 1 through 23 of
this act constitute a new chapter in Title 49 RCW.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
27. If any provision of this
act or its application to any person or circumstance is held invalid, the
remainder of the act or the application of the provision to other persons or
circumstances is not affected.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 28. This act applies
beginning with weeks of eligibility that begin on or after January 1, 2002.

---
END ---