BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF
THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1. RCW 82.29A.090 and 1981
2nd ex.s. c 4 s 9 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) Bimonthly
the state treasurer shall make distribution from the local leasehold excise tax
account to the counties and cities the amount of tax collected on behalf of
each county or city.

(2) Earnings accrued
through July 31, 2002, shall be disbursed to counties and cities proportionate
to the amount of tax collected annually on behalf of each county or city.

(3) After July 31,
2002, bimonthly the state treasurer shall disburse earnings from the local
leasehold excise tax account to the counties or cities proportionate to the
amount of tax collected on behalf of each county or city.

(4)
The state treasurer shall make the distribution under this section without
appropriation.

--- END ---