BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF
WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1. RCW 49.60.010 and 1997 c
271 s 1 are each amended to read as follows:

This chapter shall be
known as the "law against discrimination(("))."
It is an exercise of the police power of the state for the protection of the
public welfare, health, and peace of the people of this state, and in
fulfillment of the provisions of the Constitution of this state concerning
civil rights. The legislature hereby finds and declares that practices of
discrimination against any of its inhabitants because of race, creed, color,
national origin, families with children, sex, marital status, sexual
orientation, age, or the presence of any sensory, mental, or physical
disability or the use of a trained dog guide or service animal by a disabled
person are a matter of state concern, that such discrimination threatens not
only the rights and proper privileges of its inhabitants but menaces the
institutions and foundation of a free democratic state. A state agency is
herein created with powers with respect to elimination and prevention of
discrimination in employment, in credit and insurance transactions, in places
of public resort, accommodation, or amusement, and in real property
transactions because of race, creed, color, national origin, families with
children, sex, marital status, sexual orientation, age, or the presence
of any sensory, mental, or physical disability or the use of a trained dog
guide or service animal by a disabled person; and the commission established
hereunder is hereby given general jurisdiction and power for such purposes.

Sec. 2. RCW 49.60.020 and 1993 c
510 s 2 are each amended to read as follows:

The provisions of this
chapter shall be construed liberally for the accomplishment of the purposes
thereof. Nothing contained in this chapter shall be deemed to repeal any of
the provisions of any other law of this state relating to discrimination
because of race, color, creed, national origin, sex, marital status, sexual
orientation, age, or the presence of any sensory, mental, or physical
disability, other than a law which purports to require or permit doing any act
which is an unfair practice under this chapter. Nor shall anything herein
contained be construed to deny the right to any person to institute any action
or pursue any civil or criminal remedy based upon an alleged violation of his
or her civil rights. This chapter shall not be construed to endorse any
specific belief, practice, behavior, or orientation.

Sec. 3. RCW 49.60.030 and 1997 c
271 s 2 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) The right to be
free from discrimination because of race, creed, color, national origin, sex, sexual
orientation, or the presence of any sensory, mental, or physical disability
or the use of a trained dog guide or service animal by a disabled person is
recognized as and declared to be a civil right. This right shall include, but
not be limited to:

(a) The right to obtain
and hold employment without discrimination;

(b) The right to the
full enjoyment of any of the accommodations, advantages, facilities, or
privileges of any place of public resort, accommodation, assemblage, or
amusement;

(c) The right to engage
in real estate transactions without discrimination, including discrimination
against families with children;

(d) The right to engage
in credit transactions without discrimination;

(e) The right to engage
in insurance transactions or transactions with health maintenance organizations
without discrimination: PROVIDED, That a practice which is not unlawful under
RCW 48.30.300, 48.44.220, or 48.46.370 does not constitute an unfair practice
for the purposes of this subparagraph; and

(f) The right to engage
in commerce free from any discriminatory boycotts or blacklists.
Discriminatory boycotts or blacklists for purposes of this section shall be
defined as the formation or execution of any express or implied agreement,
understanding, policy or contractual arrangement for economic benefit between
any persons which is not specifically authorized by the laws of the United
States and which is required or imposed, either directly or indirectly, overtly
or covertly, by a foreign government or foreign person in order to restrict,
condition, prohibit, or interfere with or in order to exclude any person or
persons from any business relationship on the basis of race, color, creed,
religion, sex, sexual orientation, the presence of any sensory, mental,
or physical disability, or the use of a trained dog guide or service animal by
a disabled person, or national origin or lawful business relationship:
PROVIDED HOWEVER, That nothing herein contained shall prohibit the use of
boycotts as authorized by law pertaining to labor disputes and unfair labor
practices.

(2) Any person deeming
himself or herself injured by any act in violation of this chapter shall have a
civil action in a court of competent jurisdiction to enjoin further violations,
or to recover the actual damages sustained by the person, or both, together
with the cost of suit including reasonable attorneys' fees or any other
appropriate remedy authorized by this chapter or the United States Civil Rights
Act of 1964 as amended, or the Federal Fair Housing Amendments Act of 1988 (42
U.S.C. Sec. 3601 et seq.).

(3) Except for any
unfair practice committed by an employer against an employee or a prospective
employee, or any unfair practice in a real estate transaction which is the
basis for relief specified in the amendments to RCW 49.60.225 contained in
chapter 69, Laws of 1993, any unfair practice prohibited by this chapter which
is committed in the course of trade or commerce as defined in the Consumer
Protection Act, chapter 19.86 RCW, is, for the purpose of applying that
chapter, a matter affecting the public interest, is not reasonable in relation
to the development and preservation of business, and is an unfair or deceptive
act in trade or commerce.

Sec. 4. RCW 49.60.040 and 1997 c
271 s 3 are each amended to read as follows:

As used in this
chapter:

(1) "Person"
includes one or more individuals, partnerships, associations, organizations,
corporations, cooperatives, legal representatives, trustees and receivers, or
any group of persons; it includes any owner, lessee, proprietor, manager,
agent, or employee, whether one or more natural persons; and further includes
any political or civil subdivisions of the state and any agency or
instrumentality of the state or of any political or civil subdivision thereof;

(2)
"Commission" means the Washington state human rights commission;

(3)
"Employer" includes any person acting in the interest of an employer,
directly or indirectly, who employs eight or more persons, and does not include
any religious or sectarian organization not organized for private profit;

(4)
"Employee" does not include any individual employed by his or her
parents, spouse, or child, or in the domestic service of any person;

(5) "Labor
organization" includes any organization which exists for the purpose, in
whole or in part, of dealing with employers concerning grievances or terms or
conditions of employment, or for other mutual aid or protection in connection
with employment;

(6) "Employment
agency" includes any person undertaking with or without compensation to
recruit, procure, refer, or place employees for an employer;

(7) "Marital
status" means the legal status of being married, single, separated,
divorced, or widowed;

(8) "National
origin" includes "ancestry";

(9) "Full
enjoyment of" includes the right to purchase any service, commodity, or
article of personal property offered or sold on, or by, any establishment to
the public, and the admission of any person to accommodations, advantages,
facilities, or privileges of any place of public resort, accommodation, assemblage,
or amusement, without acts directly or indirectly causing persons of any
particular race, creed, color, sex, sexual orientation, national origin,
or with any sensory, mental, or physical disability, or the use of a trained
dog guide or service animal by a disabled person, to be treated as not welcome,
accepted, desired, or solicited;

(10) "Any place of
public resort, accommodation, assemblage, or amusement" includes, but is
not limited to, any place, licensed or unlicensed, kept for gain, hire, or
reward, or where charges are made for admission, service, occupancy, or use of
any property or facilities, whether conducted for the entertainment, housing,
or lodging of transient guests, or for the benefit, use, or accommodation of
those seeking health, recreation, or rest, or for the burial or other
disposition of human remains, or for the sale of goods, merchandise, services,
or personal property, or for the rendering of personal services, or for public
conveyance or transportation on land, water, or in the air, including the
stations and terminals thereof and the garaging of vehicles, or where food or
beverages of any kind are sold for consumption on the premises, or where public
amusement, entertainment, sports, or recreation of any kind is offered with or
without charge, or where medical service or care is made available, or where
the public gathers, congregates, or assembles for amusement, recreation, or
public purposes, or public halls, public elevators, and public washrooms of
buildings and structures occupied by two or more tenants, or by the owner and
one or more tenants, or any public library or educational institution, or
schools of special instruction, or nursery schools, or day care centers or
children's camps: PROVIDED, That nothing contained in this definition shall be
construed to include or apply to any institute, bona fide club, or place of
accommodation, which is by its nature distinctly private, including fraternal
organizations, though where public use is permitted that use shall be covered
by this chapter; nor shall anything contained in this definition apply to any
educational facility, columbarium, crematory, mausoleum, or cemetery operated
or maintained by a bona fide religious or sectarian institution;

(11) "Real
property" includes buildings, structures, dwellings, real estate, lands,
tenements, leaseholds, interests in real estate cooperatives, condominiums, and
hereditaments, corporeal and incorporeal, or any interest therein;

(12) "Real estate
transaction" includes the sale, appraisal, brokering, exchange, purchase,
rental, or lease of real property, transacting or applying for a real estate
loan, or the provision of brokerage services;

(13)
"Dwelling" means any building, structure, or portion thereof that is
occupied as, or designed or intended for occupancy as, a residence by one or
more families, and any vacant land that is offered for sale or lease for the
construction or location thereon of any such building, structure, or portion
thereof;

(14) "Sex"
means gender;

(15) "Sexual
orientation" means actual or perceived heterosexuality, homosexuality,
bisexuality, and gender expression or identity;

(16)
"Aggrieved person" means any person who: (a) Claims to have been
injured by an unfair practice in a real estate transaction; or (b) believes
that he or she will be injured by an unfair practice in a real estate
transaction that is about to occur;

(((16))) (17)
"Complainant" means the person who files a complaint in a real estate
transaction;

(((17))) (18)
"Respondent" means any person accused in a complaint or amended
complaint of an unfair practice in a real estate transaction;

(((18))) (19)
"Credit transaction" includes any open or closed end credit
transaction, whether in the nature of a loan, retail installment transaction,
credit card issue or charge, or otherwise, and whether for personal or for
business purposes, in which a service, finance, or interest charge is imposed,
or which provides for repayment in scheduled payments, when such credit is
extended in the regular course of any trade or commerce, including but not
limited to transactions by banks, savings and loan associations or other
financial lending institutions of whatever nature, stock brokers, or by a
merchant or mercantile establishment which as part of its ordinary business
permits or provides that payment for purchases of property or service therefrom
may be deferred;

(((19))) (20)
"Families with children status" means one or more individuals who
have not attained the age of eighteen years being domiciled with a parent or
another person having legal custody of such individual or individuals, or with
the designee of such parent or other person having such legal custody, with the
written permission of such parent or other person. Families with children status
also applies to any person who is pregnant or is in the process of securing
legal custody of any individual who has not attained the age of eighteen years;

(((20))) (21)
"Covered multifamily dwelling" means: (a) Buildings consisting of
four or more dwelling units if such buildings have one or more elevators; and
(b) ground floor dwelling units in other buildings consisting of four or more
dwelling units;

(((21))) (22)
"Premises" means the interior or exterior spaces, parts, components,
or elements of a building, including individual dwelling units and the public
and common use areas of a building;

(((22))) (23)
"Dog guide" means a dog that is trained for the purpose of guiding
blind persons or a dog that is trained for the purpose of assisting hearing
impaired persons;

(((23))) (24)
"Service animal" means an animal that is trained for the purpose of
assisting or accommodating a disabled person's sensory, mental, or physical
disability.

Sec. 5. RCW 49.60.120 and 1997 c
271 s 4 are each amended to read as follows:

The commission shall
have the functions, powers, and duties:

(1) To appoint an
executive director and chief examiner, and such investigators, examiners,
clerks, and other employees and agents as it may deem necessary, fix their
compensation within the limitations provided by law, and prescribe their
duties.

(2) To obtain upon
request and utilize the services of all governmental departments and agencies.

(3) To adopt,
promulgate, amend, and rescind suitable rules and regulations to carry out the
provisions of this chapter, and the policies and practices of the commission in
connection therewith.

(4) To receive,
impartially investigate, and pass upon complaints alleging unfair practices as
defined in this chapter.

(5) To issue such
publications and ((such)) results of investigations and research as in
its judgment will tend to promote good will and minimize or eliminate
discrimination because of sex, sexual orientation, race, creed, color,
national origin, marital status, age, or the presence of any sensory, mental,
or physical disability, or the use of a trained dog guide or service animal by
a disabled person.

(6) To make such technical
studies as are appropriate to effectuate the purposes and policies of this
chapter and to publish and distribute the reports of such studies.

(7) To cooperate and
act jointly or by division of labor with the United States or other states,
with other Washington state agencies, commissions, and other government
entities, and with political subdivisions of the state of Washington and their
respective human rights agencies to carry out the purposes of this chapter.
However, the powers which may be exercised by the commission under this
subsection permit investigations and complaint dispositions only if the
investigations are designed to reveal, or the complaint deals only with,
allegations which, if proven, would constitute unfair practices under this
chapter. The commission may perform such services for these agencies and be
reimbursed therefor.

(8) To foster good
relations between minority and majority population groups of the state through
seminars, conferences, educational programs, and other intergroup relations
activities. The commission may charge fees to participants for such
activities, however such fees may not exceed an amount necessary to cover the
costs of the programs and materials offered.

Sec. 6. RCW 49.60.130 and 1997 c
271 s 5 are each amended to read as follows:

The commission has
power to create such advisory agencies and conciliation councils, local,
regional, or statewide, as in its judgment will aid in effectuating the
purposes of this chapter. The commission may empower them to study the
problems of discrimination in all or specific fields of human relationships or
in specific instances of discrimination because of sex, race, creed, color,
national origin, marital status, sexual orientation, age, or the
presence of any sensory, mental, or physical disability or the use of a trained
dog guide or service animal by a disabled person; to foster through community
effort or otherwise good will, cooperation, and conciliation among the groups
and elements of the population of the state, and to make recommendations to the
commission for the development of policies and procedures in general and in
specific instances, and for programs of formal and informal education which the
commission may recommend to the appropriate state agency.

Such advisory agencies
and conciliation councils shall be composed of representative citizens, serving
without pay, but with reimbursement for travel expenses in accordance with RCW
43.03.050 and 43.03.060 as now existing or hereafter amended, and the
commission may make provision for technical and clerical assistance to such
agencies and councils and for the expenses of such assistance. The commission
may use organizations specifically experienced in dealing with questions of discrimination.

Sec. 7. RCW 49.60.175 and 1997 c
271 s 7 are each amended to read as follows:

It shall
be an unfair practice to use the sex, race, creed, color, national origin,
marital status, sexual orientation, or the presence of any sensory,
mental, or physical disability of any person, or the use of a trained dog guide
or service animal by a disabled person, concerning an application for credit in
any credit transaction to determine the credit worthiness of an applicant.

Sec. 8. RCW 49.60.176 and 1997 c
271 s 8 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) It is an unfair
practice for any person whether acting for himself, herself, or another in
connection with any credit transaction because of race, creed, color, national
origin, sex, marital status, sexual orientation, or the presence of any
sensory, mental, or physical disability or the use of a trained dog guide or
service animal by a disabled person:

(a) To deny credit to
any person;

(b) To increase the
charges or fees for or collateral required to secure any credit extended to any
person;

(c) To restrict the
amount or use of credit extended or to impose different terms or conditions
with respect to the credit extended to any person or any item or service
related thereto;

(d) To attempt to do
any of the unfair practices defined in this section.

(2) Nothing in this
section shall prohibit any party to a credit transaction from considering the
credit history of any individual applicant.

(3) Further,
nothing in this section shall prohibit any party to a credit transaction from
considering the application of the community property law to the individual
case or from taking reasonable action thereon.

Sec. 9. RCW 49.60.178 and 1997 c
271 s 9 are each amended to read as follows:

It is an unfair
practice for any person whether acting for himself, herself, or another in
connection with an insurance transaction or transaction with a health
maintenance organization to cancel or fail or refuse to issue or renew
insurance or a health maintenance agreement to any person because of sex,
marital status, sexual orientation, race, creed, color, national origin,
or the presence of any sensory, mental, or physical disability or the use of a
trained dog guide or service animal by a disabled person: PROVIDED, That a
practice which is not unlawful under RCW 48.30.300, 48.44.220, or 48.46.370
does not constitute an unfair practice for the purposes of this section. For
the purposes of this section, "insurance transaction" is defined in
RCW 48.01.060, health maintenance agreement is defined in RCW 48.46.020, and
"health maintenance organization" is defined in RCW 48.46.020.

The fact that such
unfair practice may also be a violation of chapter 48.30, 48.44, or 48.46 RCW
does not constitute a defense to an action brought under this section.

The
insurance commissioner, under RCW 48.30.300, and the human rights commission,
under chapter 49.60 RCW, shall have concurrent jurisdiction under this section
and shall enter into a working agreement as to procedure to be followed in
complaints under this section.

Sec. 10. RCW 49.60.180 and 1997 c
271 s 10 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) It is an
unfair practice for any employer:

(((1))) (a)
To refuse to hire any person because of age, sex, marital status, sexual
orientation, race, creed, color, national origin, or the presence of any
sensory, mental, or physical disability or the use of a trained dog guide or
service animal by a disabled person, unless based upon a bona fide occupational
qualification: PROVIDED, That the prohibition against discrimination because
of such disability shall not apply if the particular disability prevents the
proper performance of the particular worker involved.

(((2))) (b)
To discharge or bar any person from employment because of age, sex, marital
status, sexual orientation, race, creed, color, national origin, or the
presence of any sensory, mental, or physical disability or the use of a trained
dog guide or service animal by a disabled person.

(((3))) (c)
To discriminate against any person in compensation or in other terms or
conditions of employment because of age, sex, marital status, sexual
orientation, race, creed, color, national origin, or the presence of any
sensory, mental, or physical disability or the use of a trained dog guide or
service animal by a disabled person: PROVIDED, That it shall not be an unfair
practice for an employer to segregate washrooms or locker facilities on the
basis of sex, or to base other terms and conditions of employment on the sex of
employees where the commission by regulation or ruling in a particular instance
has found the employment practice to be appropriate for the practical
realization of equality of opportunity between the sexes.

(((4))) (d)
To print, or circulate, or cause to be printed or circulated any statement,
advertisement, or publication, or to use any form of application for
employment, or to make any inquiry in connection with prospective employment,
which expresses any limitation, specification, or discrimination as to age,
sex, marital status, sexual orientation, race, creed, color, national
origin, or the presence of any sensory, mental, or physical disability or the
use of a trained dog guide or service animal by a disabled person, or any
intent to make any such limitation, specification, or discrimination, unless
based upon a bona fide occupational qualification: PROVIDED, Nothing contained
herein shall prohibit advertising in a foreign language.

(2) This section
shall not be construed to require an employer to establish employment goals or
quotas based on sexual orientation or on any other basis.

Sec. 11. RCW 49.60.190 and 1997 c
271 s 11 are each amended to read as follows:

It is an unfair
practice for any labor union or labor organization:

(1) To deny membership
and full membership rights and privileges to any person because of age, sex,
marital status, sexual orientation, race, creed, color, national origin,
or the presence of any sensory, mental, or physical disability or the use of a
trained dog guide or service animal by a disabled person.

(2) To expel from
membership any person because of age, sex, marital status, sexual
orientation, race, creed, color, national origin, or the presence of any
sensory, mental, or physical disability or the use of a trained dog guide or
service animal by a disabled person.

(3) To
discriminate against any member, employer, employee, or other person to whom a
duty of representation is owed because of age, sex, marital status, sexual
orientation, race, creed, color, national origin, or the presence of any
sensory, mental, or physical disability or the use of a trained dog guide or service
animal by a disabled person.

Sec. 12. RCW 49.60.200 and 1997 c
271 s 12 are each amended to read as follows:

It is an
unfair practice for any employment agency to fail or refuse to classify
properly or refer for employment, or otherwise to discriminate against, an
individual because of age, sex, marital status, sexual orientation,
race, creed, color, national origin, or the presence of any sensory, mental, or
physical disability or the use of a trained dog guide or service animal by a
disabled person, or to print or circulate, or cause to be printed or circulated
any statement, advertisement, or publication, or to use any form of application
for employment, or to make any inquiry in connection with prospective employment,
which expresses any limitation, specification or discrimination as to age, sex,
race, sexual orientation, creed, color, or national origin, or the
presence of any sensory, mental, or physical disability or the use of a trained
dog guide or service animal by a disabled person, or any intent to make any
such limitation, specification, or discrimination, unless based upon a bona
fide occupational qualification: PROVIDED, Nothing contained herein shall
prohibit advertising in a foreign language.

Sec. 13. RCW 49.60.215 and 1997 c
271 s 13 are each amended to read as follows:

It shall
be an unfair practice for any person or the person's agent or employee to
commit an act which directly or indirectly results in any distinction,
restriction, or discrimination, or the requiring of any person to pay a larger
sum than the uniform rates charged other persons, or the refusing or
withholding from any person the admission, patronage, custom, presence,
frequenting, dwelling, staying, or lodging in any place of public resort,
accommodation, assemblage, or amusement, except for conditions and limitations
established by law and applicable to all persons, regardless of race, creed,
color, national origin, sexual orientation, sex, the presence of any
sensory, mental, or physical disability, or the use of a trained dog guide or
service animal by a disabled person: PROVIDED, That this section shall not be
construed to require structural changes, modifications, or additions to make
any place accessible to a disabled person except as otherwise required by law:
PROVIDED, That behavior or actions constituting a risk to property or other
persons can be grounds for refusal and shall not constitute an unfair practice.

Sec. 14. RCW 49.60.222 and 1997 c
400 s 3 and 1997 c 271 s 14 are each reenacted and amended to read as follows:

(1) It is an unfair
practice for any person, whether acting for himself, herself, or another,
because of sex, marital status, sexual orientation, race, creed, color,
national origin, families with children status, the presence of any sensory,
mental, or physical disability, or the use of a trained dog guide or service
animal by a disabled person:

(a) To refuse to engage
in a real estate transaction with a person;

(b) To discriminate
against a person in the terms, conditions, or privileges of a real estate
transaction or in the furnishing of facilities or services in connection
therewith;

(c) To refuse to
receive or to fail to transmit a bona fide offer to engage in a real estate
transaction from a person;

(d) To refuse to
negotiate for a real estate transaction with a person;

(e) To represent to a
person that real property is not available for inspection, sale, rental, or
lease when in fact it is so available, or to fail to bring a property listing
to his or her attention, or to refuse to permit the person to inspect real
property;

(f) To discriminate in
the sale or rental, or to otherwise make unavailable or deny a dwelling, to any
person; or to a person residing in or intending to reside in that dwelling
after it is sold, rented, or made available; or to any person associated with
the person buying or renting;

(g) To make, print,
circulate, post, or mail, or cause to be so made or published a statement,
advertisement, or sign, or to use a form of application for a real estate
transaction, or to make a record or inquiry in connection with a prospective
real estate transaction, which indicates, directly or indirectly, an intent to
make a limitation, specification, or discrimination with respect thereto;

(h) To offer, solicit,
accept, use, or retain a listing of real property with the understanding that a
person may be discriminated against in a real estate transaction or in the
furnishing of facilities or services in connection therewith;

(i) To expel a person
from occupancy of real property;

(j) To discriminate in
the course of negotiating, executing, or financing a real estate transaction
whether by mortgage, deed of trust, contract, or other instrument imposing a
lien or other security in real property, or in negotiating or executing any
item or service related thereto including issuance of title insurance, mortgage
insurance, loan guarantee, or other aspect of the transaction. Nothing in this
section shall limit the effect of RCW 49.60.176 relating to unfair practices in
credit transactions; or

(k) To attempt to do
any of the unfair practices defined in this section.

(2) For the purposes of
this chapter discrimination based on the presence of any sensory, mental, or
physical disability or the use of a trained dog guide or service animal by a
blind, deaf, or physically disabled person includes:

(a) A refusal to
permit, at the expense of the disabled person, reasonable modifications of
existing premises occupied or to be occupied by such person if such
modifications may be necessary to afford such person full enjoyment of the
dwelling, except that, in the case of a rental, the landlord may, where it is
reasonable to do so, condition permission for a modification on the renter
agreeing to restore the interior of the dwelling to the condition that existed
before the modification, reasonable wear and tear excepted;

(b) To refuse to make
reasonable accommodation in rules, policies, practices, or services when such
accommodations may be necessary to afford a person with the presence of any
sensory, mental, or physical disability and/or the use of a trained dog guide
or service animal by a blind, deaf, or physically disabled person equal
opportunity to use and enjoy a dwelling; or

(c) To fail to design
and construct covered multifamily dwellings and premises in conformance with
the federal fair housing amendments act of 1988 (42 U.S.C. Sec. 3601 et seq.)
and all other applicable laws or regulations pertaining to access by persons
with any sensory, mental, or physical disability or use of a trained dog guide
or service animal. Whenever the requirements of applicable laws or regulations
differ, the requirements which require greater accessibility for persons with
any sensory, mental, or physical disability shall govern.

Nothing in (a) or (b)
of this subsection shall apply to: (i) A single-family house rented or leased
by the owner if the owner does not own or have an interest in the proceeds of
the rental or lease of more than three such single-family houses at one time,
the rental or lease occurred without the use of a real estate broker or
salesperson, as defined in RCW 18.85.010, and the rental or lease occurred
without the publication, posting, or mailing of any advertisement, sign, or
statement in violation of subsection (1)(g) of this section; or (ii) rooms or
units in dwellings containing living quarters occupied or intended to be
occupied by no more than four families living independently of each other if
the owner maintains and occupies one of the rooms or units as his or her
residence.

(3) Notwithstanding any
other provision of this chapter, it shall not be an unfair practice or a denial
of civil rights for any public or private educational institution to separate
the sexes or give preference to or limit use of dormitories, residence halls,
or other student housing to persons of one sex or to make distinctions on the
basis of marital or families with children status.

(4) Except pursuant to
subsection (2)(a) of this section, this section shall not be construed to
require structural changes, modifications, or additions to make facilities
accessible to a disabled person except as otherwise required by law. Nothing
in this section affects the rights, responsibilities, and remedies of landlords
and tenants pursuant to chapter 59.18 or 59.20 RCW, including the right to post
and enforce reasonable rules of conduct and safety for all tenants and their
guests, provided that chapters 59.18 and 59.20 RCW are only affected to the
extent they are inconsistent with the nondiscrimination requirements of this
chapter. Nothing in this section limits the applicability of any reasonable federal,
state, or local restrictions regarding the maximum number of occupants
permitted to occupy a dwelling.

(5) Notwithstanding any
other provision of this chapter, it shall not be an unfair practice for any
public establishment providing for accommodations offered for the full
enjoyment of transient guests as defined by RCW 9.91.010(1)(c) to make
distinctions on the basis of families with children status. Nothing in this
section shall limit the effect of RCW 49.60.215 relating to unfair practices in
places of public accommodation.

(6) Nothing in this
chapter prohibiting discrimination based on families with children status
applies to housing for older persons as defined by the federal fair housing
amendments act of 1988, 42 U.S.C. Sec. 3607(b)(1) through (3), as amended by
the housing for older persons act of 1995, P.L. 104-76, as enacted on December
28, 1995. Nothing in this chapter authorizes requirements for housing for
older persons different than the requirements in the federal fair housing amendments
act of 1988, 42 U.S.C. Sec. 3607(b)(1) through (3), as amended by the housing
for older persons act of 1995, P.L. 104-76, as enacted on December 28, 1995.

Sec. 15. RCW 49.60.223 and 1997 c
271 s 15 are each amended to read as follows:

It is an
unfair practice for any person, for profit, to induce or attempt to induce any
person to sell or rent any real property by representations regarding the entry
or prospective entry into the neighborhood of a person or persons of a particular
race, creed, color, sex, national origin, sexual orientation, families
with children status, or with any sensory, mental, or physical disability
and/or the use of a trained dog guide or service animal by a blind, deaf, or
physically disabled person.

Sec. 16. RCW 49.60.224 and 1997 c
271 s 16 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) Every provision in
a written instrument relating to real property which purports to forbid or
restrict the conveyance, encumbrance, occupancy, or lease thereof to
individuals of a specified race, creed, color, sex, national origin, sexual
orientation, families with children status, or with any sensory, mental, or
physical disability or the use of a trained dog guide or service animal by a
blind, deaf, or physically disabled person, and every condition, restriction,
or prohibition, including a right of entry or possibility of reverter, which
directly or indirectly limits the use or occupancy of real property on the
basis of race, creed, color, sex, national origin, sexual orientation,
families with children status, or the presence of any sensory, mental, or
physical disability or the use of a trained dog guide or service animal by a
blind, deaf, or physically disabled person is void.

(2) It is an
unfair practice to insert in a written instrument relating to real property a
provision that is void under this section or to honor or attempt to honor such
a provision in the chain of title.

Sec. 17. RCW 49.60.225 and 1997 c
271 s 17 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) When a reasonable
cause determination has been made under RCW 49.60.240 that an unfair practice
in a real estate transaction has been committed and a finding has been made
that the respondent has engaged in any unfair practice under RCW 49.60.250, the
administrative law judge shall promptly issue an order for such relief suffered
by the aggrieved person as may be appropriate, which may include actual damages
as provided by the federal fair housing amendments act of 1988 (42 U.S.C. Sec.
3601 et seq.), and injunctive or other equitable relief. Such order may, to
further the public interest, assess a civil penalty against the respondent:

(a) In an amount up to
ten thousand dollars if the respondent has not been determined to have
committed any prior unfair practice in a real estate transaction;

(b) In an amount up to
twenty-five thousand dollars if the respondent has been determined to have
committed one other unfair practice in a real estate transaction during the
five-year period ending on the date of the filing of this charge; or

(c) In an amount up to
fifty thousand dollars if the respondent has been determined to have committed
two or more unfair practices in a real estate transaction during the seven-year
period ending on the date of the filing of this charge, for loss of the right
secured by RCW 49.60.010, 49.60.030, 49.60.040, and 49.60.222 through
49.60.224, as now or hereafter amended, to be free from discrimination in real
property transactions because of sex, marital status, race, creed, color,
national origin, sexual orientation, families with children status, or
the presence of any sensory, mental, or physical disability or the use of a
trained dog guide or service animal by a blind, deaf, or physically disabled
person. Enforcement of the order and appeal therefrom by the complainant or
respondent may be made as provided in RCW 49.60.260 and 49.60.270. If acts
constituting the unfair practice in a real estate transaction that is the
object of the charge are determined to have been committed by the same natural
person who has been previously determined to have committed acts constituting
an unfair practice in a real estate transaction, then the civil penalty of up
to fifty thousand dollars may be imposed without regard to the period of time
within which any subsequent unfair practice in a real estate transaction
occurred. All civil penalties assessed under this section shall be paid into
the state treasury and credited to the general fund.

(2) Such order shall
not affect any contract, sale, conveyance, encumbrance, or lease consummated
before the issuance of an order that involves a bona fide purchaser,
encumbrancer, or tenant who does not have actual notice of the charge filed
under this chapter.

(3) Notwithstanding any
other provision of this chapter, persons awarded damages under this section may
not receive additional damages pursuant to RCW 49.60.250.

Sec. 18. RCW 49.60.250 and 1993 c
510 s 23 and 1993 c 69 s 14 are each reenacted and amended to read as follows:

(1) In case of failure
to reach an agreement for the elimination of such unfair practice, and upon the
entry of findings to that effect, the entire file, including the complaint and
any and all findings made, shall be certified to the chairperson of the
commission. The chairperson of the commission shall thereupon request the
appointment of an administrative law judge under Title 34 RCW to hear the
complaint and shall cause to be issued and served in the name of the commission
a written notice, together with a copy of the complaint, as the same may have
been amended, requiring the respondent to answer the charges of the complaint
at a hearing before the administrative law judge, at a time and place to be
specified in such notice.

(2) The place of any
such hearing may be the office of the commission or another place designated by
it. The case in support of the complaint shall be presented at the hearing by
counsel for the commission: PROVIDED, That the complainant may retain
independent counsel and submit testimony and be fully heard. No member or
employee of the commission who previously made the investigation or caused the
notice to be issued shall participate in the hearing except as a witness, nor
shall the member or employee participate in the deliberations of the
administrative law judge in such case. Any endeavors or negotiations for
conciliation shall not be received in evidence.

(3) The respondent
shall file a written answer to the complaint and appear at the hearing in
person or otherwise, with or without counsel, and submit testimony and be fully
heard. The respondent has the right to cross-examine the complainant.

(4) The administrative
law judge conducting any hearing may permit reasonable amendment to any
complaint or answer. Testimony taken at the hearing shall be under oath and
recorded.

(5) If, upon all the
evidence, the administrative law judge finds that the respondent has engaged in
any unfair practice, the administrative law judge shall state findings of fact
and shall issue and file with the commission and cause to be served on such
respondent an order requiring such respondent to cease and desist from such
unfair practice and to take such affirmative action, including, (but not
limited to) hiring, reinstatement or upgrading of employees, with or without
back pay, an admission or restoration to full membership rights in any
respondent organization, or to take such other action as, in the judgment of
the administrative law judge, will effectuate the purposes of this chapter,
including action that could be ordered by a court, except that damages for
humiliation and mental suffering shall not exceed ((ten)) thirty-five
thousand dollars, and including a requirement for report of the matter on
compliance. Relief available for violations of RCW 49.60.222 through 49.60.224
shall be limited to the relief specified in RCW 49.60.225.

(6) If a determination
is made that retaliatory action, as defined in RCW 42.40.050, has been taken
against a whistleblower, as defined in RCW 42.40.020, the administrative law
judge may, in addition to any other remedy, impose a civil penalty upon the
retaliator of up to three thousand dollars and issue an order to the state
employer to suspend the retaliator for up to thirty days without pay. At a
minimum, the administrative law judge shall require that a letter of reprimand
be placed in the retaliator's personnel file. All penalties recovered shall be
paid into the state treasury and credited to the general fund.

(7) The final order of
the administrative law judge shall include a notice to the parties of the right
to obtain judicial review of the order by appeal in accordance with the
provisions of RCW 34.05.510 through 34.05.598, and that such appeal must be served
and filed within thirty days after the service of the order on the parties.

(8) If, upon all the
evidence, the administrative law judge finds that the respondent has not
engaged in any alleged unfair practice, the administrative law judge shall
state findings of fact and shall similarly issue and file an order dismissing
the complaint.

(9) An order dismissing
a complaint may include an award of reasonable attorneys' fees in favor of the
respondent if the administrative law judge concludes that the complaint was
frivolous, unreasonable, or groundless.

(10) The commission
shall establish rules of practice to govern, expedite, and effectuate the
foregoing procedure.

Sec. 19. RCW 48.30.300 and 1993 c
492 s 287 are each amended to read as follows:

Notwithstanding any
provision contained in Title 48 RCW to the contrary:

(1) No person or entity
engaged in the business of insurance in this state shall refuse to issue any
contract of insurance or cancel or decline to renew such contract because of
the sex ((or)), marital status, or sexual orientation as
defined in RCW 49.60.040, or the presence of any sensory, mental, or
physical handicap of the insured or prospective insured. The amount of
benefits payable, or any term, rate, condition, or type of coverage shall not
be restricted, modified, excluded, increased or reduced on the basis of the sex
((or)), marital status, or sexual orientation, or be
restricted, modified, excluded or reduced on the basis of the presence of any
sensory, mental, or physical handicap of the insured or prospective insured.
Subject to the provisions of subsection (2) of this section these provisions
shall not prohibit fair discrimination on the basis of sex, or marital status,
or the presence of any sensory, mental, or physical handicap when bona fide
statistical differences in risk or exposure have been substantiated.

(2) With respect to
disability policies issued or renewed on and after July 1, 1994, that provide
coverage against loss arising from medical, surgical, hospital, or emergency
care services:

(a) Policies shall
guarantee continuity of coverage. Such provision, which shall be included in
every policy, shall provide that:

(i) The policy may be
canceled or nonrenewed without the prior written approval of the commissioner
only for nonpayment of premium or as permitted under RCW 48.18.090; and

(ii) The policy may be
canceled or nonrenewed because of a change in the physical or mental condition or
health of a covered person only with the prior written approval of the
commissioner. Such approval shall be granted only when the insurer has
discharged its obligation to continue coverage for such person by obtaining
coverage with another insurer, health care service contractor, or health
maintenance organization, which coverage is comparable in terms of premiums and
benefits as defined by rule of the commissioner.

(b) It is an unfair
practice for a disability insurer to modify the coverage provided or rates
applying to an in-force disability insurance policy and to fail to make such
modification in all such issued and outstanding policies.

(c) Subject to rules
adopted by the commissioner, it is an unfair practice for a disability insurer
to:

(i) Cease the sale of a
policy form unless it has received prior written authorization from the
commissioner and has offered all policyholders covered under such discontinued
policy the opportunity to purchase comparable coverage without health
screening; or

(ii) Engage in a
practice that subjects policyholders to rate increases on discontinued policy
forms unless such policyholders are offered the opportunity to purchase
comparable coverage without health screening.

The
insurer may limit an offer of comparable coverage without health screening to a
period not less than thirty days from the date the offer is first made.

---
END ---