BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF
WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec.
1. The legislature finds
that:

(1) Foster parents have
little means to cope with sexually abused children. There is no support for
these children in the foster home setting, contributing to the fact that
seventy percent of these children have multiple foster home placements;

(2) Two-thirds of the
work of child protective services in Washington state is linked with families
that it sees repeatedly. The families have cumulative risks such as drug
abuse, domestic violence, and mental illness. Sexual abuse of children in
these families frequently occurs;

(3) Many of our next
generation's sexual predators are in foster care today. These children have
had severe and repeated early abuse, are under age twelve, and move freely in
schools and child care. The division of children and family services reports
that these children have molested an average of five children while they are in
foster care; and

(4) In Pierce county
alone, seventy-five of these children are now in foster care. This pressures
an already stressed foster care system, and sets the stage for these children
to enter into a lifetime of sexually deviant behavior.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
2. A foster parent retention
pilot program is established to retain foster parents who care for children who
act out sexually. The foster parent retention pilot program is to be
implemented under the division of children and family services' contract and
supervision. A contractor must demonstrate experience providing in-home case
management to regular division of children and family services foster parents.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
3. (1) The sum of one
hundred seventy-five thousand dollars, or as much thereof as may be necessary,
is appropriated for the fiscal year ending June 30, 2002, from the general fund
to the division of children and family services to be used according to the
following schedule:

(a) One hundred
thirty-seven thousand five hundred dollars shall be used for direct services
under section 4(1) of this act; and

(b) Thirty-seven
thousand five hundred dollars shall be used for evaluation of the foster parent
retention pilot program under section 4(2) of this act.

(2) The sum of one
hundred seventy-five thousand dollars, or as much thereof as may be necessary,
is appropriated for the fiscal year ending June 30, 2003, from the general fund
to the division of children and family services for the purposes of this act.

(a) One hundred
thirty-seven thousand five hundred dollars shall be used for direct services
under section 4(1) of this act; and

(b) Thirty-seven
thousand five hundred dollars shall be used for evaluation of the foster parent
retention pilot program under section 4(2) of this act.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
4. (1) Under the foster
parent retention pilot program, foster parents who care for children who act
out sexually will receive:

(a) Emergency
assistance; and

(b) Problem solving in
the home and group training.

(2) The division of
children and family services shall provide a first interim independent
evaluation report by December 2001, a second interim report by December 2002,
and a final report by December 2003, to the appropriate committees of the
legislature. The reports must include:

(a) The retention rate
of foster parents in the program as compared to a comparable group of foster
parents who are not in the program;

(b) Incidents of sexual
molestation of children by children;

(c) An estimate of the
amount of money saved because of the foster parent retention pilot program; and

(d) Recommendations by
the division of children and family services on whether a foster parent
retention program should be continued.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 5. This act expires January
1, 2004.

---
END ---