BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF
WASHINGTON:

_5 NEW SECTION. Sec. 1. A new section is
added to chapter 49.28

_6 RCW to read as follows:

_7 (1) The definitions in this subsection apply
throughout this

_8 section unless the context clearly requires otherwise.

_9 (a) "Employee" means a nonsupervisory
individual employed by a

10 health facility who is involved in direct patient care
activities

11 or clinical services and who receives an hourly wage or
is

12 classified as a nonsupervisory employee for collective
bargaining

13 purposes.

14 (b) "Employer" means an individual, partnership,
association,

15 corporation, or person or group of persons acting
directly or

16 indirectly in the interest of a health care facility.
"Employer"

17 includes all state institutions and political
subdivisions of the

18 state.

p. 1 HB
1527

_1 (c) "Health care facility" means a health
care facility

_2 licensed by the state or authorized to provide care
within the

_3 state.

_4 (d) "Overtime" means the hours worked in
excess of an agreed

_5 upon, predetermined, regularly scheduled shift or work
week, as

_6 determined by contract, established work scheduling
practices,

_7 policies, or procedures.

_8 (2) No employee of a health care facility can be
required or

_9 forced to work overtime. Any other attempts to compel
or force

10 employees to work overtime are contrary to public policy
and any

11 such requirement contained in any contract, agreement,
or

12 understanding executed after the effective date of this
section is

13 void.

14 (3)(a) Notwithstanding any provision of law to the
contrary, no

15 health care facility shall require an employee to accept
work in

16 excess of an agreed upon, predetermined, regularly
scheduled shift

17 or work week, as determined by contract, established
work

18 scheduling practices, policies, or procedures.

19 (b) The acceptance by any employee of such work in
excess of an

20 agreed upon, predetermined, regularly scheduled shift or
work

21 week, as determined by contract, established work
scheduling

22 practices, policies, or procedures is strictly voluntary
and the

23 refusal of any employee to accept such overtime work is
not

24 grounds for discrimination, dismissal, discharge, or any
other

25 penalty, threats of reports for discipline, or
employment decision

26 adverse to the employee.

27 (c) This section shall not apply in the case of an
unforeseen

28 national, state, or municipal emergency, and then
overtime is

29 required only as a last resort.

30 (4)(a) Any employer who violates this section is
subject to a

31 penalty under RCW 49.28.030. If there are three or more
violations

32 of this section per health care facility within a
calendar year,

33 the fines shall treble for the fourth and subsequent
violations. If

34 any health care facility has seven or more violations,
such

35 facility shall be investigated and if the investigators
find an

36 ongoing pattern of deliberate violations of this
section, the

37 health care facility license may be suspended or
revoked. If a

38 health care facility is found to deliberately violate
the

HB 1527 p. 2

_1 provisions of this section, a notice of the violation
will be

_2 published in the Washington state register to include
the name of

_3 the institution, date of violation, and the method of
remedy

_4 provided to the employee. Such notice shall be
published in the

_5 Washington state register within thirty days of
resolution of the

_6 complaint, lawsuit, or both. The violation shall also
be reported

_7 to state and federal health care licensure and
accrediting

_8 organizations.

_9 (b) In any retaliatory or employment suit brought
for

10 violations of this section, the fact that any employee
worked in

11 excess of forty hours per week and any evidence thereto
is a prima

12 facie violation of this section. To rebut this
presumption,

13 employers must prove that a federal, state, or national
emergency

14 occurred and overtime is required only as a last resort
at the

15 time the employee was forced or compelled to work.

16 (c) The employee who initially reports violations of
this

17 section, which lead to sanctions of the health care
facility, has

18 the right to receive twenty percent of the fine for
making the

19 report.

‑‑‑ END ‑‑‑

p. 3 HB
1527