BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF
WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1. RCW 80.24.010 and 1994 c
83 s 1 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) Every public
service company subject to regulation by the commission shall, on or before the
date specified by the commission for filing annual reports under RCW 80.04.080,
file with the commission a statement on oath showing its gross operating
revenue from intrastate operations for the preceding calendar year or portion
thereof and pay to the commission a regulatory fee ((equal to
one-tenth of one percent of the first fifty thousand dollars of gross operating
revenue, plus two-tenths of one percent of any gross operating revenue in
excess of fifty thousand dollars: PROVIDED, That the fee shall in no case be
less than one dollar.

The percentage rates
of gross operating revenue to be paid in any year may be decreased by the
commission for any class of companies subject to the payment of such fees, by
general order entered before March 1st of such year, and for such purpose such
companies shall be classified as follows:)) at the rate established by the commission under subsection (2) of
this section.

(2) Regulatory fees
to be paid in any year shall be established by general order of the commission
before March 1st of the year. Regulatory fees shall be levied as a percentage
of gross operating revenue and shall not exceed the following rates:

(a) Electrical,
gas, water, ((telecommunications,)) and irrigation companies, which
shall constitute class one((.)): One-tenth of one percent of the
first fifty thousand dollars of gross operating revenue, plus two-tenths of one
percent of any gross operating revenue in excess of fifty thousand dollars, but
in any event not less than one hundred dollars;

(b) Telecommunications
companies, which shall constitute class two: Three-tenths of one percent of
gross operating revenue, but in any event not less than one hundred dollars;

(c) Every other
company subject to regulation by the commission, for which regulatory fees are
not otherwise fixed by law ((shall pay fees as herein provided and)),
which shall constitute additional classes according to kinds of businesses
engaged in: One-tenth of one percent of the first fifty thousand dollars of
gross operating revenue, plus two-tenths of one percent of any gross operating
revenue in excess of fifty thousand dollars, but in any event not less than one
hundred dollars.

(3) Any payment
of the fee imposed by this section made after its due date shall include a late
fee of ((two)) ten percent of the amount due. Delinquent fees
shall accrue interest at the rate of one percent per month.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
2. A new section is added
to chapter 80.24 RCW to read as follows:

The commission may
establish by rule fees for specific transactions or filings. The commission
shall maintain a record of the revenues collected from the fees from each class
of public service companies and shall consider such revenues in fixing the
regulatory fees for each class under RCW 80.24.010.

Sec. 3. RCW 80.24.020 and 1961 c
14 s 80.24.020 are each amended to read as follows:

In fixing
the percentage rates of gross operating revenue to be paid in any year, the
commission shall consider all moneys then in the public service revolving fund
and the fees currently to be paid into such fund, including any fees
collected under section 2 of this act, to the end that the fees collected
from the several classes of companies shall be approximately the same as the
reasonable cost of supervising and regulating such classes of companies.

---
END ---