BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF
WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1. RCW 82.04.050 and 2000
2nd sp.s. c 4 s 23 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) "Sale at
retail" or "retail sale" means every sale of tangible personal
property (including articles produced, fabricated, or imprinted) to all persons
irrespective of the nature of their business and including, among others,
without limiting the scope hereof, persons who install, repair, clean, alter,
improve, construct, or decorate real or personal property of or for consumers
other than a sale to a person who presents a resale certificate under RCW
82.04.470 and who:

(a) Purchases for the
purpose of resale as tangible personal property in the regular course of
business without intervening use by such person, but a purchase for the purpose
of resale by a regional transit authority under RCW 81.112.300 is not a sale
for resale; or

(b) Installs, repairs,
cleans, alters, imprints, improves, constructs, or decorates real or personal
property of or for consumers, if such tangible personal property becomes an
ingredient or component of such real or personal property without intervening
use by such person; or

(c) Purchases for the
purpose of consuming the property purchased in producing for sale a new article
of tangible personal property or substance, of which such property becomes an
ingredient or component or is a chemical used in processing, when the primary
purpose of such chemical is to create a chemical reaction directly through
contact with an ingredient of a new article being produced for sale; or

(d) Purchases for the
purpose of consuming the property purchased in producing ferrosilicon which is
subsequently used in producing magnesium for sale, if the primary purpose of
such property is to create a chemical reaction directly through contact with an
ingredient of ferrosilicon; or

(e) Purchases for the
purpose of providing the property to consumers as part of competitive telephone
service, as defined in RCW 82.04.065. The term shall include every sale of
tangible personal property which is used or consumed or to be used or consumed
in the performance of any activity classified as a "sale at retail"
or "retail sale" even though such property is resold or utilized as
provided in (a), (b), (c), (d), or (e) of this subsection following such use.
The term also means every sale of tangible personal property to persons engaged
in any business which is taxable under RCW 82.04.280 (2) and (7) and 82.04.290.

(2) The term "sale
at retail" or "retail sale" shall include the sale of or charge
made for tangible personal property consumed and/or for labor and services
rendered in respect to the following:

(a) The installing,
repairing, cleaning, altering, imprinting, or improving of tangible personal
property of or for consumers, including charges made for the mere use of
facilities in respect thereto, but excluding charges made for the use of
coin-operated laundry facilities when such facilities are situated in an
apartment house, rooming house, or mobile home park for the exclusive use of
the tenants thereof, and also excluding sales of laundry service to nonprofit
health care facilities, and excluding services rendered in respect to live
animals, birds and insects;

(b) The constructing,
repairing, decorating, or improving of new or existing buildings or other
structures under, upon, or above real property of or for consumers, including
the installing or attaching of any article of tangible personal property therein
or thereto, whether or not such personal property becomes a part of the realty
by virtue of installation, and shall also include the sale of services or
charges made for the clearing of land and the moving of earth excepting the
mere leveling of land used in commercial farming or agriculture;

(c) The charge for
labor and services rendered in respect to constructing, repairing, or improving
any structure upon, above, or under any real property owned by an owner who
conveys the property by title, possession, or any other means to the person
performing such construction, repair, or improvement for the purpose of
performing such construction, repair, or improvement and the property is then
reconveyed by title, possession, or any other means to the original owner;

(d) The sale of or
charge made for labor and services rendered in respect to the cleaning,
fumigating, razing or moving of existing buildings or structures, but shall not
include the charge made for janitorial services; and for purposes of this section
the term "janitorial services" shall mean those cleaning and
caretaking services ordinarily performed by commercial janitor service
businesses including, but not limited to, wall and window washing, floor
cleaning and waxing, and the cleaning in place of rugs, drapes and upholstery.
The term "janitorial services" does not include painting, papering,
repairing, furnace or septic tank cleaning, snow removal or sandblasting;

(e) The sale of or
charge made for labor and services rendered in respect to automobile towing and
similar automotive transportation services, but not in respect to those
required to report and pay taxes under chapter 82.16 RCW;

(f) The sale of and
charge made for the furnishing of lodging and all other services by a hotel,
rooming house, tourist court, motel, trailer camp, and the granting of any
similar license to use real property, as distinguished from the renting or
leasing of real property, and it shall be presumed that the occupancy of real
property for a continuous period of one month or more constitutes a rental or
lease of real property and not a mere license to use or enjoy the same. For
the purposes of this subsection, it shall be presumed that the sale of and
charge made for the furnishing of lodging for a continuous period of one month
or more to a person is a rental or lease of real property and not a mere
license to enjoy the same;

(g) The sale of or
charge made for tangible personal property, labor and services to persons
taxable under (a), (b), (c), (d), (e), and (f) of this subsection when such
sales or charges are for property, labor and services which are used or
consumed in whole or in part by such persons in the performance of any activity
defined as a "sale at retail" or "retail sale" even though
such property, labor and services may be resold after such use or consumption.
Nothing contained in this subsection shall be construed to modify subsection
(1) of this section and nothing contained in subsection (1) of this section
shall be construed to modify this subsection.

(3) The term "sale
at retail" or "retail sale" shall include the sale of or charge
made for personal, business, or professional services including amounts
designated as interest, rents, fees, admission, and other service emoluments however
designated, received by persons engaging in the following business activities:

(a) Amusement and
recreation services including but not limited to golf, pool, billiards,
skating, bowling, ski lifts and tows, day trips for sightseeing purposes, and
others, when provided to consumers;

(b) Abstract, title
insurance, and escrow services;

(c) Credit bureau
services;

(d) Automobile parking
and storage garage services;

(e) Landscape
maintenance and horticultural services but excluding (i) horticultural services
provided to farmers and (ii) pruning, trimming, repairing, removing, and
clearing of trees and brush near electric transmission or distribution lines or
equipment, if performed by or at the direction of an electric utility;

(f) Service charges
associated with tickets to professional sporting events; and

(g) The following
personal services: Physical fitness services, tanning salon services, tattoo
parlor services, steam bath services, turkish bath services, escort services,
and dating services.

(4) The term shall also
include the renting or leasing of tangible personal property to consumers and
the rental of equipment with an operator.

(5) The term shall also
include the providing of telephone service, as defined in RCW 82.04.065, to
consumers.

(6) The term shall also
include the sale of canned software other than a sale to a person who presents
a resale certificate under RCW 82.04.470, regardless of the method of delivery
to the end user, but shall not include custom software or the customization of
canned software.

(7) The term shall not
include the sale of or charge made for labor and services rendered in respect
to the building, repairing, or improving of any street, place, road, highway,
easement, right of way, mass public transportation terminal or parking
facility, bridge, tunnel, or trestle which is owned by a municipal corporation
or political subdivision of the state or by the United States and which is used
or to be used primarily for foot or vehicular traffic including mass
transportation vehicles of any kind.

(8) The term shall also
not include sales of chemical sprays or washes to persons for the purpose of
postharvest treatment of fruit for the prevention of scald, fungus, mold, or
decay, nor shall it include sales of feed, seed, seedlings, fertilizer, agents
for enhanced pollination including insects such as bees, and spray materials
to: (a) Persons who participate in the federal conservation reserve program,
the environmental quality incentives program, the wetlands reserve program, and
the wildlife habitat incentives program, or their successors administered by
the United States department of agriculture; (b) farmers for the purpose of
producing for sale any agricultural product; and (c) farmers acting under
cooperative habitat development or access contracts with an organization exempt
from federal income tax under 26 U.S.C. Sec. 501(c)(3) or the Washington state
department of fish and wildlife to produce or improve wildlife habitat on land
that the farmer owns or leases.

(9) The term shall not
include the sale of or charge made for labor and services rendered in respect
to the constructing, repairing, decorating, or improving of new or existing
buildings or other structures under, upon, or above real property of or for the
United States, any instrumentality thereof, or a county or city housing
authority created pursuant to chapter 35.82 RCW, including the installing, or
attaching of any article of tangible personal property therein or thereto,
whether or not such personal property becomes a part of the realty by virtue of
installation. Nor shall the term include the sale of services or charges made
for the clearing of land and the moving of earth of or for the United States,
any instrumentality thereof, or a county or city housing authority. Nor shall
the term include the sale of services or charges made for cleaning up for the
United States, or its instrumentalities, radioactive waste and other byproducts
of weapons production and nuclear research and development.

(10) Until July 1,
2003, the term shall not include the sale of or charge made for labor and
services rendered for environmental remedial action as defined in RCW
82.04.2635(2).

Sec. 2. RCW 67.28.180 and 1997 c
220 s 501 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) Subject to the
conditions set forth in subsections (2) and (3) of this section, the
legislative body of any county or any city, is authorized to levy and collect a
special excise tax of not to exceed two percent on the sale of or charge made
for the furnishing of lodging ((by a hotel, rooming house, tourist court,
motel, trailer camp, and the granting of any similar license to use real
property, as distinguished from the renting or leasing of real property:
PROVIDED, That it shall be presumed that the occupancy of real property for a
continuous period of one month or more constitutes a rental or lease of real
property and not a mere license to use or to enjoy the same)) that is
subject to tax under chapter 82.08 RCW.

(2) Any levy authorized
by this section shall be subject to the following:

(a) Any county
ordinance or resolution adopted pursuant to this section shall contain, in
addition to all other provisions required to conform to this chapter, a
provision allowing a credit against the county tax for the full amount of any
city tax imposed pursuant to this section upon the same taxable event.

(b) In the event that
any county has levied the tax authorized by this section and has, prior to June
26, 1975, either pledged the tax revenues for payment of principal and interest
on city revenue or general obligation bonds authorized and issued pursuant to
RCW 67.28.150 through 67.28.160 or has authorized and issued revenue or general
obligation bonds pursuant to the provisions of RCW 67.28.150 through 67.28.160,
such county shall be exempt from the provisions of (a) of this subsection, to
the extent that the tax revenues are pledged for payment of principal and
interest on bonds issued at any time pursuant to the provisions of RCW
67.28.150 through 67.28.160: PROVIDED, That so much of such pledged tax
revenues, together with any investment earnings thereon, not immediately
necessary for actual payment of principal and interest on such bonds may be
used: (i) In any county with a population of one million or more, for
repayment either of limited tax levy general obligation bonds or of any county
fund or account from which a loan was made, the proceeds from the bonds or loan
being used to pay for constructing, installing, improving, and equipping
stadium capital improvement projects, and to pay for any engineering, planning,
financial, legal and professional services incident to the development of such
stadium capital improvement projects, regardless of the date the debt for such capital
improvement projects was or may be incurred; (ii) in any county with a
population of one million or more, for repayment or refinancing of bonded
indebtedness incurred prior to January 1, 1997, for any purpose authorized by
this section or relating to stadium repairs or rehabilitation, including but
not limited to the cost of settling legal claims, reimbursing operating funds,
interest payments on short-term loans, and any other purpose for which such
debt has been incurred if the county has created a public stadium authority to
develop a stadium and exhibition center under RCW 36.102.030; or (iii) in other
counties, for county-owned facilities for agricultural promotion. A county is
exempt under this subsection in respect to city revenue or general obligation
bonds issued after April 1, 1991, only if such bonds mature before January 1,
2013.

As used in this
subsection (2)(b), "capital improvement projects" may include, but
not be limited to a stadium restaurant facility, restroom facilities, artificial
turf system, seating facilities, parking facilities and scoreboard and
information system adjacent to or within a county owned stadium, together with
equipment, utilities, accessories and appurtenances necessary thereto. The
stadium restaurant authorized by this subsection (2)(b) shall be operated by a
private concessionaire under a contract with the county.

(c)(i) No city within a
county exempt under subsection (2)(b) of this section may levy the tax
authorized by this section so long as said county is so exempt.

(ii) If bonds have been
issued under RCW 43.99N.020 and any necessary property transfers have been made
under RCW 36.102.100, no city within a county with a population of one million
or more may levy the tax authorized by this section before January 1, 2021.

(iii) However, in the
event that any city in a county described in (i) or (ii) of this subsection
(2)(c) has levied the tax authorized by this section and has, prior to June 26,
1975, authorized and issued revenue or general obligation bonds pursuant to the
provisions of RCW 67.28.150 through 67.28.160, such city may levy the tax so
long as the tax revenues are pledged for payment of principal and interest on
bonds issued at any time pursuant to the provisions of RCW 67.28.150 through 67.28.160.

(3) Any levy authorized
by this section by a county that has levied the tax authorized by this section
and has, prior to June 26, 1975, either pledged the tax revenues for payment of
principal and interest on city revenue or general obligation bonds authorized
and issued pursuant to RCW 67.28.150 through 67.28.160 or has authorized and
issued revenue or general obligation bonds pursuant to the provisions of RCW
67.28.150 through 67.28.160 shall be subject to the following:

(a) Taxes collected
under this section in any calendar year before 2013 in excess of five million
three hundred thousand dollars shall only be used as follows:

(i) Seventy-five
percent from January 1, 1992, through December 31, 2000, and seventy percent
from January 1, 2001, through December 31, 2012, for art museums, cultural
museums, heritage museums, the arts, and the performing arts. Moneys spent
under this subsection (3)(a)(i) shall be used for the purposes of this
subsection (3)(a)(i) in all parts of the county.

(ii) Twenty-five
percent from January 1, 1992, through December 31, 2000, and thirty percent
from January 1, 2001, through December 31, 2012, for the following purposes and
in a manner reflecting the following order of priority: Stadium purposes as
authorized under subsection (2)(b) of this section; acquisition of open space
lands; youth sports activities; and tourism promotion. If all or part of the
debt on the stadium is refinanced, all revenues under this subsection
(3)(a)(ii) shall be used to retire the debt.

(b) From January 1,
2013, through December 31, 2015, in a county with a population of one million
or more, all revenues under this section shall be used to retire the debt on
the stadium, or deposited in the stadium and exhibition center account under RCW
43.99N.060 after the debt on the stadium is retired.

(c) From January 1,
2016, through December 31, 2020, in a county with a population of one million
or more, all revenues under this section shall be deposited in the stadium and
exhibition center account under RCW 43.99N.060.

(d) At least seventy
percent of moneys spent under (a)(i) of this subsection for the period January
1, 1992, through December 31, 2000, shall be used only for the purchase,
design, construction, and remodeling of performing arts, visual arts, heritage,
and cultural facilities, and for the purchase of fixed assets that will benefit
art, heritage, and cultural organizations. For purposes of this subsection,
fixed assets are tangible objects such as machinery and other equipment intended
to be held or used for ten years or more. Moneys received under this
subsection (3)(d) may be used for payment of principal and interest on bonds
issued for capital projects. Qualifying organizations receiving moneys under
this subsection (3)(d) must be financially stable and have at least the
following:

(i) A legally
constituted and working board of directors;

(ii) A record of
artistic, heritage, or cultural accomplishments;

(iii) Been in existence
and operating for at least two years;

(iv) Demonstrated
ability to maintain net current liabilities at less than thirty percent of
general operating expenses;

(v) Demonstrated
ability to sustain operational capacity subsequent to completion of projects or
purchase of machinery and equipment; and

(vi) Evidence that
there has been independent financial review of the organization.

(e) At least forty
percent of the revenues distributed pursuant to (a)(i) of this subsection for
the period January 1, 2001, through December 31, 2012, shall be deposited in an
account and shall be used to establish an endowment. Principal in the account
shall remain permanent and irreducible. The earnings from investments of
balances in the account may only be used for the purposes of (a)(i) of this
subsection.

(f) School districts
and schools shall not receive revenues distributed pursuant to (a)(i) of this
subsection.

(g) Moneys distributed
to art museums, cultural museums, heritage museums, the arts, and the
performing arts, and moneys distributed for tourism promotion shall be in
addition to and may not be used to replace or supplant any other funding by the
legislative body of the county.

(h) As used in this
section, "tourism promotion" includes activities intended to attract
visitors for overnight stays, arts, heritage, and cultural events, and
recreational, professional, and amateur sports events. Moneys allocated to
tourism promotion in a class AA county shall be allocated to nonprofit
organizations formed for the express purpose of tourism promotion in the
county. Such organizations shall use moneys from the taxes to promote events
in all parts of the class AA county.

(i) No taxes collected
under this section may be used for the operation or maintenance of a public
stadium that is financed directly or indirectly by bonds to which the tax is
pledged. Expenditures for operation or maintenance include all expenditures
other than expenditures that directly result in new fixed assets or that
directly increase the capacity, life span, or operating economy of existing
fixed assets.

(j) No ad valorem
property taxes may be used for debt service on bonds issued for a public
stadium that is financed by bonds to which the tax is pledged, unless the taxes
collected under this section are or are projected to be insufficient to meet
debt service requirements on such bonds.

(k) If a substantial
part of the operation and management of a public stadium that is financed
directly or indirectly by bonds to which the tax is pledged is performed by a
nonpublic entity or if a public stadium is sold that is financed directly or
indirectly by bonds to which the tax is pledged, any bonds to which the tax is
pledged shall be retired. This subsection (3)(k) does not apply in respect to
a public stadium under chapter 36.102 RCW transferred to, owned by, or
constructed by a public facilities district under chapter 36.100 RCW or a
stadium and exhibition center.

(l) The county shall
not lease a public stadium that is financed directly or indirectly by bonds to
which the tax is pledged to, or authorize the use of the public stadium by, a
professional major league sports franchise unless the sports franchise gives
the right of first refusal to purchase the sports franchise, upon its sale, to
local government. This subsection (3)(l) does not apply to contracts in
existence on April 1, 1986.

If a court of competent
jurisdiction declares any provision of this subsection (3) invalid, then that
invalid provision shall be null and void and the remainder of this section is
not affected.

Sec. 3. RCW 67.40.090 and 1995 c
386 s 15 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) Commencing April 1,
1982, there is imposed, and the department of revenue shall collect, in King
county a special excise tax on the sale of or charge made for the furnishing of
lodging ((by a hotel, rooming house, tourist court, motel, or trailer camp,
and the granting of any similar license to use real property, as distinguished
from the renting or leasing of real property)) that is subject to tax under
chapter 82.08 RCW, except that no such tax may be levied on any premises
having fewer than sixty lodging units. ((It shall be presumed that the
occupancy of real property for a continuous period of one month or more
constitutes rental or lease of real property and not a mere license to use or
enjoy the same.)) The legislature on behalf of the state pledges to
maintain and continue this tax until the bonds authorized by this chapter are
fully redeemed, both principal and interest.

(2) The rate of the tax
imposed under this section shall be as provided in this subsection.

(a) From April 1, 1982,
through December 31, 1982, inclusive, the rate shall be three percent in the
city of Seattle and two percent in King county outside the city of Seattle.

(b) From January 1,
1983, through June 30, 1988, inclusive, the rate shall be five percent in the
city of Seattle and two percent in King county outside the city of Seattle.

(c) From July 1, 1988,
through December 31, 1992, inclusive, the rate shall be six percent in the city
of Seattle and two and four-tenths percent in King county outside the city of
Seattle.

(d) From January 1,
1993, and until bonds and all other borrowings authorized under RCW 67.40.030
are retired, the rate shall be seven percent in the city of Seattle and two and
eight-tenths percent in King county outside the city of Seattle.

(e) Except as otherwise
provided in (d) of this subsection, on and after the change date, the rate
shall be six percent in the city of Seattle and two and four-tenths percent in
King county outside the city of Seattle.

(f) As used in this
section, "change date" means the October 1st next occurring after
certification occurs under (g) of this subsection.

(g) On August 1st of
1998 and of each year thereafter until certification occurs under this
subsection, the state treasurer shall determine whether seventy-one and
forty-three one-hundredths percent of the revenues actually collected and
deposited with the state treasurer for the tax imposed under this section during
the twelve months ending June 30th of that year, excluding penalties and
interest, exceeds the amount actually paid in debt service during the same
period for bonds issued under RCW 67.40.030 by at least two million dollars.
If so, the state treasurer shall so certify to the department of revenue.

(3) The proceeds of the
special excise tax shall be deposited as provided in this subsection.

(a) Through June 30,
1988, inclusive, all proceeds shall be deposited in the state convention and
trade center account.

(b) From July 1, 1988,
through December 31, 1992, inclusive, eighty-three and thirty-three
one-hundredths percent of the proceeds shall be deposited in the state
convention and trade center account. The remainder shall be deposited in the
state convention and trade center operations account.

(c) From January 1,
1993, until the change date, eighty-five and seventy-one-hundredths percent of
the proceeds shall be deposited in the state convention and trade center
account. The remainder shall be deposited in the state convention and trade
center operations account.

(d) On and after the
change date, eighty-three and thirty-three one-hundredths percent of the
proceeds shall be deposited in the state convention and trade center account.
The remainder shall be deposited in the state convention and trade center
operations account.

(4) Chapter 82.32 RCW
applies to the tax imposed under this section.

Sec. 4. RCW 36.100.040 and 1995
c 396 s 4 are each amended to read as follows:

A public facilities
district may impose an excise tax on the sale of or charge made for the
furnishing of lodging ((by a hotel, rooming house, tourist court, motel, or
trailer camp, and the granting of any similar license to use real property, as
distinguished from the renting or leasing of real property)) that is
subject to tax under chapter 82.08 RCW, except that no such tax may be
levied on any premises having fewer than forty lodging units. However, if a
public facilities district has not imposed such an excise tax prior to December
31, 1995, the public facilities district may only impose the excise tax if a
ballot proposition authorizing the imposition of the tax has been approved by a
simple majority vote of voters of the public facilities district voting on the
proposition.

The rate of the tax
shall not exceed two percent and the proceeds of the tax shall only be used for
the acquisition, design, construction, remodeling, maintenance, equipping,
reequipping, repairing, and operation of its public facilities. This excise
tax shall not be imposed until the district has approved the proposal to
acquire, design, and construct the public facilities.

A public facilities
district may not impose the tax authorized in this section if, after the tax
authorized in this section was imposed, the effective combined rate of state
and local excise taxes, including sales and use taxes and excise taxes on
lodging, imposed on the sale of or charge made for furnishing of lodging in any
jurisdiction in the public facilities district exceeds eleven and one-half
percent.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
5. This act applies
retroactively to events occurring on and after September 1, 2001.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 6. This act is necessary for
the immediate preservation of the public peace, health, or safety, or support
of the state government and its existing public institutions, and takes effect
immediately.

---
END ---