BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF
WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec.
1. A new section is added
to chapter 72.65 RCW to read as follows:

(1) Not later than July
1, 2002, and every five years thereafter, the department shall provide to each
county: (a) A projection for the number of essential state community justice
facilities under its jurisdiction pursuant to this chapter that may be sited in
that county during the succeeding five-year period; and (b) siting criteria for
each of the projected facilities.

(2) In developing the
projections required under subsection (1) of this section, the department shall
make every effort to ensure that the facilities are allocated equitably among
the counties, taking into account at least the following:

(a) The locations of
existing essential state community justice facilities;

(b) The locations of
other projected essential state community justice facilities; and

(c) The number of
offenders to be served in relation to the number of offenders sentenced in the
county.

Sec. 2. RCW 72.65.010 and 1992 c
7 s 56 are each amended to read as follows:

As used in this
chapter, the following terms shall have the following meanings:

(1)
"Department" shall mean the department of corrections.

(2)
"Secretary" shall mean the secretary of corrections.

(3) "State
correctional institutions" shall mean and include all state adult
correctional facilities established pursuant to law under the jurisdiction of
the department for the treatment of convicted felons sentenced to a term of
confinement.

(4)
"Prisoner" shall mean a person either male or female, convicted of a
felony and sentenced by the superior court to a term of confinement and
treatment in a state correctional institution under the jurisdiction of the
department.

(5)
"Superintendent" shall mean the superintendent of a state
correctional institution, camp or other facility now or hereafter established
under the jurisdiction of the department pursuant to law.

(6) "Essential
state community justice facility" has the same meaning as provided in RCW
36.70A.030.

(7) "Siting
criteria" means requirements for the location of a specific essential
state community justice facility as determined by the department. Siting
criteria shall include, but are not limited to, the following:

(a) Cost parameters;

(b) Building
requirements, including size, floor plan, and staffing accommodations;

(c) Security
features and emergency services response times;

(d) Proximity to
public transportation;

(e) Proximity to
educational, vocational, and employment opportunities, as appropriate;

(f) Access to
treatment providers and facilities;

(g) Ability to
accommodate specific program activities;

(h) A distance
requirement of not less than one thousand feet from schools, school bus stops,
licensed child care homes and centers, parks, and places of worship; and

(i) A requirement
that the facility maintain appropriate staffing for resident and community
safety.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
3. A new section is added
to chapter 72.05 RCW to read as follows:

(1) Not later than July
1, 2002, and every five years thereafter, the department shall provide to each
county: (a) A projection for the number of essential state community justice
facilities under its jurisdiction pursuant to this chapter that may be sited in
that county during the succeeding five-year period; and (b) siting criteria for
each of the projected facilities.

(2) In developing the
projections required under subsection (1) of this section, the department shall
make every effort to ensure that the facilities are allocated equitably among
the counties, taking into account at least the following:

(a) The locations of
existing essential state community justice facilities;

(b) The locations of
other projected essential state community justice facilities; and

(c) The number of
juveniles to be served in relation to the number of juveniles sentenced in the
county.

Sec. 4. RCW 72.05.020 and 1998 c
269 s 2 are each amended to read as follows:

As used in this
chapter, unless the context requires otherwise:

(1) "Community
facility" means a group care facility operated for the care of juveniles
committed to the department under RCW 13.40.185. A county detention facility
that houses juveniles committed to the department under RCW 13.40.185 pursuant
to a contract with the department is not a community facility.

(2)
"Department" means the department of social and health services.

(3) "Essential
state community justice facility" has the same meaning as provided in RCW
36.70A.030.

(4)
"Juvenile" means a person under the age of twenty-one who has been
sentenced to a term of confinement under the supervision of the department
under RCW 13.40.185.

(((4))) (5)
"Service provider" means the entity that operates a community
facility.

(6) "Siting
criteria" means requirements for the location of a specific essential
state community justice facility as determined by the department. Siting
criteria shall include, but are not limited to, the following:

(a) Cost parameters;

(b) Building
requirements, including size, floor plan, and staffing accommodations;

(c) Security
features and emergency services response times;

(d) Proximity to
public transportation and schools;

(e) Proximity to
vocational, employment, and community service opportunities, as appropriate;

(f) Access to
treatment services and providers;

(g) Ability to
accommodate specific program activities;

(h) A distance
requirement of not less than one thousand feet from schools, school bus stops,
licensed child care homes and centers, parks, and places of worship; and

(i) A requirement
that the facility maintain appropriate staffing for resident and community
safety.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
5. A new section is added
to chapter 71.09 RCW to read as follows:

(1) Not later than July
1, 2002, and every five years thereafter, the department shall provide to each
county: (a) A projection for the number of essential state community justice
facilities under its jurisdiction pursuant to this chapter that may be sited in
that county during the succeeding five-year period; and (b) the siting criteria
established in section 6 of this act.

(2) In developing the
projections required under subsection (1) of this section, the department shall
make every effort to ensure that the facilities are allocated equitably among
the counties, taking into account at least the following:

(a) The locations of
existing essential state community justice facilities;

(b) The locations of
other projected essential state community justice facilities; and

(c) The number of
residents to be served in relation to the number of residents sentenced in the
county.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
6. A new section is added
to chapter 71.09 RCW to read as follows:

A less restrictive
alternative housing facility shall meet the following minimum criteria:

(1) The location of the
housing unit shall enable:

(a) An average response
time of five minutes or less by law enforcement, or publicly employed staff,
other than residential staff of the housing unit, who are qualified and
designated to perform security response functions relative to the housing unit;
and

(b) An average response
time by fire safety and emergency medical personnel that is no longer than the
average of the local community.

(2) The property where
the housing unit is located may not be within line of sight of, adjacent to, or
in direct proximity with, any of the following:

(a) Schools, including
public schools, full-time private schools serving any of grades K-12, and
public or private institutions of higher education;

(b) School bus stops;

(c) Preschools,
including Headstart and the early childhood education assistance program;

(d) Licensed child care
homes and centers;

(e) Parks and publicly
dedicated trails;

(f) Sports fields,
playgrounds, and recreational and community centers;

(g) Places of worship,
including churches, mosques, synagogues, and temples.

(3) The housing unit
shall contain at least the following security devices:

(a) An installed
household security or alarm system that alerts staff to any unauthorized
movements into or outside of the housing unit, and that features a main control
panel with a power supply, battery backup, and tamperproof switch;

(b) An interior siren
for security and fire;

(c) Cellular phone
services with clear and uninterrupted services; and

(d) Alarm-activated
listening devices and camera systems.

(4) The housing unit
shall be located in an area where a contractor is available to install, monitor,
and repair the security devices specified in subsection (3) of this section.

(5) The housing unit
shall be located within an approximate one-hour one-way commute to a city or
town with a population of twenty-five thousand or more.

(6) The housing unit
shall be located in an area in which qualified treatment providers are
available.

Sec. 7. RCW 71.09.020 and 1995 c
216 s 1 are each amended to read as follows:

Unless the context
clearly requires otherwise, the definitions in this section apply throughout
this chapter.

(1) "Sexually
violent predator" means any person who has been convicted of or charged
with a crime of sexual violence and who suffers from a mental abnormality or
personality disorder which makes the person likely to engage in predatory acts
of sexual violence if not confined in a secure facility.

(2) "Mental
abnormality" means a congenital or acquired condition affecting the
emotional or volitional capacity which predisposes the person to the commission
of criminal sexual acts in a degree constituting such person a menace to the
health and safety of others.

(3) "Likely to
engage in predatory acts of sexual violence" means that the person more
probably than not will engage in such acts. Such likelihood must be evidenced
by a recent overt act if the person is not totally confined at the time the
petition is filed under RCW 71.09.030.

(4)
"Predatory" means acts directed towards strangers or individuals with
whom a relationship has been established or promoted for the primary purpose of
victimization.

(5) "Recent overt
act" means any act that has either caused harm of a sexually violent
nature or creates a reasonable apprehension of such harm.

(6) "Sexually
violent offense" means an act committed on, before, or after July 1, 1990,
that is: (a) An act defined in Title 9A RCW as rape in the first degree, rape
in the second degree by forcible compulsion, rape of a child in the first or
second degree, statutory rape in the first or second degree, indecent liberties
by forcible compulsion, indecent liberties against a child under age fourteen,
incest against a child under age fourteen, or child molestation in the first or
second degree; (b) a felony offense in effect at any time prior to July 1,
1990, that is comparable to a sexually violent offense as defined in (a) of
this subsection, or any federal or out-of-state conviction for a felony offense
that under the laws of this state would be a sexually violent offense as
defined in this subsection; (c) an act of murder in the first or second degree,
assault in the first or second degree, assault of a child in the first or
second degree, kidnapping in the first or second degree, burglary in the first
degree, residential burglary, or unlawful imprisonment, which act, either at
the time of sentencing for the offense or subsequently during civil commitment
proceedings pursuant to chapter 71.09 RCW, has been determined beyond a
reasonable doubt to have been sexually motivated, as that term is defined in
RCW 9.94A.030; or (d) an act as described in chapter 9A.28 RCW, that is an
attempt, criminal solicitation, or criminal conspiracy to commit one of the
felonies designated in (a), (b), or (c) of this subsection.

(7) "Less
restrictive alternative" means court-ordered treatment in a setting less
restrictive than total confinement.

(8) "Less
restrictive alternative housing facility" means a facility owned and
operated by the department of social and health services, or operated under
contract with the department of social and health services, for the purpose of
housing no more than three persons at one time who have been ordered
conditionally released to a less restrictive alternative.

(9)
"Secretary" means the secretary of social and health services or his
or her designee.

(10) "Essential
state community justice facility" has the same meaning as provided in RCW
36.70A.030.

Sec. 8. RCW 36.70A.030 and 1997
c 429 s 3 are each amended to read as follows:

Unless the context
clearly requires otherwise, the definitions in this section apply throughout
this chapter.

(1) "Adopt a
comprehensive land use plan" means to enact a new comprehensive land use
plan or to update an existing comprehensive land use plan.

(2) "Agricultural
land" means land primarily devoted to the commercial production of
horticultural, viticultural, floricultural, dairy, apiary, vegetable, or animal
products or of berries, grain, hay, straw, turf, seed, Christmas trees not
subject to the excise tax imposed by RCW 84.33.100 through 84.33.140, finfish
in upland hatcheries, or livestock, and that has long-term commercial
significance for agricultural production.

(3) "City"
means any city or town, including a code city.

(4) "Comprehensive
land use plan," "comprehensive plan," or "plan" means
a generalized coordinated land use policy statement of the governing body of a
county or city that is adopted pursuant to this chapter.

(5) "Critical
areas" include the following areas and ecosystems: (a) Wetlands; (b)
areas with a critical recharging effect on aquifers used for potable water; (c)
fish and wildlife habitat conservation areas; (d) frequently flooded areas; and
(e) geologically hazardous areas.

(6)
"Department" means the department of community, trade, and economic
development.

(7) "Development
regulations" or "regulation" means the controls placed on
development or land use activities by a county or city, including, but not
limited to, zoning ordinances, critical areas ordinances, shoreline master
programs, official controls, planned unit development ordinances, subdivision
ordinances, and binding site plan ordinances together with any amendments
thereto. A development regulation does not include a decision to approve a
project permit application, as defined in RCW 36.70B.020, even though the
decision may be expressed in a resolution or ordinance of the legislative body
of the county or city.

(8) "Essential
public facilities" means those facilities that are typically difficult to
site, such as airports, state education facilities, state or regional
transportation facilities as defined in RCW 47.06.140, state and local
correctional facilities, essential state community justice facilities, solid
waste handling facilities, and in‑patient facilities including substance
abuse facilities, mental health facilities, and group homes.

(9) "Essential
state community justice facilities" means essential public facilities that
are: (a) Community facilities as defined in RCW 72.05.020 and owned or
operated by, or under contract with, the department of social and health
services pursuant to chapter 72.05 RCW; (b) less restrictive alternative
housing facilities as defined in RCW 71.09.020; and (c) work‑release or
other community‑based facilities owned or operated by, or under contract
with, the department of corrections.

(10)
"Forest land" means land primarily devoted to growing trees for
long-term commercial timber production on land that can be economically and
practically managed for such production, including Christmas trees subject to
the excise tax imposed under RCW 84.33.100 through 84.33.140, and that has
long-term commercial significance. In determining whether forest land is
primarily devoted to growing trees for long-term commercial timber production
on land that can be economically and practically managed for such production,
the following factors shall be considered: (a) The proximity of the land to
urban, suburban, and rural settlements; (b) surrounding parcel size and the
compatibility and intensity of adjacent and nearby land uses; (c) long-term
local economic conditions that affect the ability to manage for timber
production; and (d) the availability of public facilities and services
conducive to conversion of forest land to other uses.

(((9))) (11)
"Geologically hazardous areas" means areas that because of their
susceptibility to erosion, sliding, earthquake, or other geological events, are
not suited to the siting of commercial, residential, or industrial development
consistent with public health or safety concerns.

(((10))) (12)
"Long-term commercial significance" includes the growing capacity,
productivity, and soil composition of the land for long-term commercial
production, in consideration with the land's proximity to population areas,
and the possibility of more intense uses of the land.

(((11))) (13)
"Minerals" include gravel, sand, and valuable metallic substances.

(((12))) (14)
"Public facilities" include streets, roads, highways, sidewalks,
street and road lighting systems, traffic signals, domestic water systems,
storm and sanitary sewer systems, parks and recreational facilities, and
schools.

(((13))) (15)
"Public services" include fire protection and suppression, law
enforcement, public health, education, recreation, environmental protection,
and other governmental services.

(((14))) (16)
"Rural character" refers to the patterns of land use and development
established by a county in the rural element of its comprehensive plan:

(a) In which open
space, the natural landscape, and vegetation predominate over the built
environment;

(b) That foster
traditional rural lifestyles, rural-based economies, and opportunities to both
live and work in rural areas;

(c) That provide visual
landscapes that are traditionally found in rural areas and communities;

(d) That are compatible
with the use of the land by wildlife and for fish and wildlife habitat;

(e) That reduce the
inappropriate conversion of undeveloped land into sprawling, low‑density
development;

(f) That generally do
not require the extension of urban governmental services; and

(g) That are consistent
with the protection of natural surface water flows and ground water and surface
water recharge and discharge areas.

(((15))) (17)
"Rural development" refers to development outside the urban growth
area and outside agricultural, forest, and mineral resource lands designated
pursuant to RCW 36.70A.170. Rural development can consist of a variety of uses
and residential densities, including clustered residential development, at
levels that are consistent with the preservation of rural character and the
requirements of the rural element. Rural development does not refer to
agriculture or forestry activities that may be conducted in rural areas.

(((16))) (18)
"Rural governmental services" or "rural services" include
those public services and public facilities historically and typically
delivered at an intensity usually found in rural areas, and may include
domestic water systems, fire and police protection services, transportation and
public transit services, and other public utilities associated with rural
development and normally not associated with urban areas. Rural services do
not include storm or sanitary sewers, except as otherwise authorized by RCW
36.70A.110(4).

(((17))) (19)
"Urban growth" refers to growth that makes intensive use of land for
the location of buildings, structures, and impermeable surfaces to such a
degree as to be incompatible with the primary use of land for the production of
food, other agricultural products, or fiber, or the extraction of mineral
resources, rural uses, rural development, and natural resource lands designated
pursuant to RCW 36.70A.170. A pattern of more intensive rural development, as
provided in RCW 36.70A.070(5)(d), is not urban growth. When allowed to spread
over wide areas, urban growth typically requires urban governmental services.
"Characterized by urban growth" refers to land having urban growth
located on it, or to land located in relationship to an area with urban growth
on it as to be appropriate for urban growth.

(((18))) (20)
"Urban growth areas" means those areas designated by a county
pursuant to RCW 36.70A.110.

(((19))) (21)
"Urban governmental services" or "urban services" include
those public services and public facilities at an intensity historically and
typically provided in cities, specifically including storm and sanitary sewer
systems, domestic water systems, street cleaning services, fire and police
protection services, public transit services, and other public utilities
associated with urban areas and normally not associated with rural areas.

(((20))) (22)
"Wetland" or "wetlands" means areas that are inundated or
saturated by surface water or ground water at a frequency and duration
sufficient to support, and that under normal circumstances do support, a
prevalence of vegetation typically adapted for life in saturated soil
conditions. Wetlands generally include swamps, marshes, bogs, and similar
areas. Wetlands do not include those artificial wetlands intentionally created
from nonwetland sites, including, but not limited to, irrigation and drainage
ditches, grass-lined swales, canals, detention facilities, wastewater treatment
facilities, farm ponds, and landscape amenities, or those wetlands created
after July 1, 1990, that were unintentionally created as a result of the
construction of a road, street, or highway. Wetlands may include those
artificial wetlands intentionally created from nonwetland areas created to
mitigate conversion of wetlands.

Sec. 9. RCW 36.70A.200 and 1998
c 171 s 3 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) The comprehensive
plan of each county and city that is planning under this chapter shall include
a process for identifying and siting essential public facilities. ((Essential
public facilities include those facilities that are typically difficult to
site, such as airports, state education facilities and state or regional transportation
facilities as defined in RCW 47.06.140, state and local correctional
facilities, solid waste handling facilities, and in-patient facilities
including substance abuse facilities, mental health facilities, and group
homes.))

(2) The office of financial
management shall maintain a list of those essential state public facilities
that are required or likely to be built within the next ((six)) five
years. The office of financial management may at any time add facilities to
the list.

(3) No local comprehensive
plan or development regulation may preclude the siting of essential public
facilities, including essential state community justice facilities.

(4) Local
comprehensive plans and development regulations adopted under this chapter must
comply with the requirements of section 10 of this act on or before September
1, 2003.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
10. A new section is added
to chapter 36.70A RCW to read as follows:

(1) On or before
September 1, 2003, the legislative authority of each county shall adopt a
countywide planning policy to establish the process for siting and to provide
for an equitable distribution of essential state community justice facilities
within the county and the cities located in whole or in part within the
county. The countywide planning policy required by this section shall be
adopted in cooperation with the cities located in whole or in part within the
county.

(2) Pursuant to
sections 1, 3, and 5 of this act, the department of corrections and the department
of social and health services shall provide all counties with projections for
the numbers of essential state community justice facilities to be sited within
the county during the succeeding five-year period. The department of social
and health services and the department of corrections shall be notified by each
county of its intent to begin the countywide planning policy process required
by this section and shall be invited to participate in this process.

(3) The countywide
planning policy required by this section shall, at a minimum, address the
following:

(a) The location of
existing essential state community justice facilities;

(b) The social,
economic, and other impacts of the existing essential state community justice
facilities on the communities in which they are located;

(c) The incremental
social, economic, and other impacts of siting additional essential state
community justice facilities in communities in which essential state community
justice facilities are currently located;

(d) A proposed
allocation of projected essential state community justice facilities among the
county and the cities located in whole or in part within the county; and

(e) Coordination of
development regulations, including but not limited to zoning regulations and
design standards, to ensure that the proposed allocation of projected essential
state community justice facilities can be achieved.

(4) Within six months
of the date the countywide planning policy required by subsection (1) of this
section is adopted, the county and each city located in whole or in part within
the county shall adopt development regulations implementing the countywide
planning policy.

(5) No
later than July 1, 2002, the department shall adopt guidelines under chapter
34.05 RCW to guide the adoption of the countywide planning policies required by
this section. The department shall consult with interested parties, conduct
public hearings, and consider public input when adopting these guidelines.
These guidelines shall be minimum guidelines for adopting the countywide
planning policies required by this section but shall allow for regional
differences existing in the state. The intent of the guidelines is to assist
counties and their cities to meet the requirements of this section.

---
END ---