BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF
WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1. RCW 58.17.020 and 1995 c
32 s 2 are each amended to read as follows:

As used in this
chapter, unless the context or subject matter clearly requires otherwise, the
words or phrases defined in this section shall have the indicated meanings.

(1)
"Subdivision" is the division or redivision of land into ((five))
ten or more lots, tracts, parcels, sites or divisions for the purpose of
sale, lease, or transfer of ownership, except as provided in subsection (6) of
this section.

(2) "Plat" is
a map or representation of a subdivision, showing thereon the division of a
tract or parcel of land into lots, blocks, streets and alleys or other
divisions and dedications.

(3)
"Dedication" is the deliberate appropriation of land by an owner for
any general and public uses, reserving to himself no other rights than such as
are compatible with the full exercise and enjoyment of the public uses to which
the property has been devoted. The intention to dedicate shall be evidenced by
the owner by the presentment for filing of a final plat or short plat showing
the dedication thereon; and, the acceptance by the public shall be evidenced by
the approval of such plat for filing by the appropriate governmental unit.

A dedication of an area
of less than two acres for use as a public park may include a designation of a
name for the park, in honor of a deceased individual of good character.

(4) "Preliminary
plat" is a neat and approximate drawing of a proposed subdivision showing
the general layout of streets and alleys, lots, blocks, and other elements of a
subdivision consistent with the requirements of this chapter. The preliminary
plat shall be the basis for the approval or disapproval of the general layout
of a subdivision.

(5) "Final
plat" is the final drawing of the subdivision and dedication prepared for
filing for record with the county auditor and containing all elements and
requirements set forth in this chapter and in local regulations adopted under
this chapter.

(6) "Short
subdivision" is the division or redivision of land into ((four)) nine
or fewer lots, tracts, parcels, sites or divisions for the purpose of sale,
lease, or transfer of ownership((: PROVIDED, That)). The legislative
authority of any county, city, or town ((may)) shall
by local ordinance increase to nine the number of lots, tracts, or
parcels to be regulated as short subdivisions ((to a maximum of nine)).

(7) "Binding site
plan" means a drawing to a scale specified by local ordinance which: (a)
Identifies and shows the areas and locations of all streets, roads,
improvements, utilities, open spaces, and any other matters specified by local
regulations; (b) contains inscriptions or attachments setting forth such
appropriate limitations and conditions for the use of the land as are
established by the local government body having authority to approve the site
plan; and (c) contains provisions making any development be in conformity with
the site plan.

(8) "Short
plat" is the map or representation of a short subdivision.

(9) "Lot" is
a fractional part of divided lands having fixed boundaries, being of sufficient
area and dimension to meet minimum zoning requirements for width and area. The
term shall include tracts or parcels.

(10) "Block"
is a group of lots, tracts, or parcels within well defined and fixed
boundaries.

(11) "County
treasurer" shall be as defined in chapter 36.29 RCW or the office or
person assigned such duties under a county charter.

(12) "County
auditor" shall be as defined in chapter 36.22 RCW or the office or person
assigned such duties under a county charter.

(13) "County road
engineer" shall be as defined in chapter 36.40 RCW or the office or person
assigned such duties under a county charter.

(14) "Planning
commission" means that body as defined in chapters 36.70, 35.63, or 35A.63
RCW as designated by the legislative body to perform a planning function or
that body assigned such duties and responsibilities under a city or county charter.

(15) "County
commissioner" shall be as defined in chapter 36.32 RCW or the body
assigned such duties under a county charter.

Sec. 2. RCW 58.17.060 and 1990
1st ex.s. c 17 s 51 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) The legislative
body of a city, town, or county shall adopt regulations and procedures, and
appoint administrative personnel for the summary approval of short plats and
short subdivisions or alteration or vacation thereof. When an alteration or
vacation involves a public dedication, the alteration or vacation shall be
processed as provided in RCW 58.17.212 or 58.17.215. Such regulations shall be
adopted by ordinance and shall provide that a short plat and short subdivision
may be approved only if written findings that are appropriate, as provided in
RCW 58.17.110, are made by the administrative personnel, and may contain wholly
different requirements than those governing the approval of preliminary and
final plats of subdivisions and may require surveys and monumentations and
shall require filing of a short plat, or alteration or vacation thereof, for
record in the office of the county auditor: PROVIDED, That such regulations
must contain a requirement that land in short subdivisions may not be further
divided in any manner within a period of five years without the filing of a
final plat, except that when the short plat contains fewer than ((four
parcels)) the maximum number of lots, tracts, or parcels permitted by
local ordinance under RCW 58.17.020(6), nothing in this section shall
prevent the owner who filed the short plat from filing an alteration within the
five-year period to create up to a total of ((four lots)) the maximum
number of lots, tracts, or parcels permitted by local ordinance under RCW
58.17.020(6) within the original short plat boundaries: PROVIDED FURTHER,
That such regulations are not required to contain a penalty clause as provided
in RCW 36.32.120 and may provide for wholly injunctive relief.

An ordinance requiring
a survey shall require that the survey be completed and filed with the
application for approval of the short subdivision.

(2)
Cities, towns, and counties shall include in their short plat regulations and
procedures pursuant to subsection (1) of this section provisions for
considering sidewalks and other planning features that assure safe walking
conditions for students who walk to and from school.

---
END ---