BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF
WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec.
1. A new section is added
to chapter 43.21C RCW to read as follows:

(1) Decisions
pertaining to the following activities are exempt from this chapter: (a)
Construction of or location of any residential structures of ten or fewer
dwelling units; (b) construction of an office, school, commercial,
recreational, service, or storage building with eight thousand or fewer square
feet of gross floor area, and with associated parking for forty or fewer
automobiles; (c) construction of a parking lot designed for forty or fewer
automobiles; (d) division of land into nine or fewer lots or parcels; and (e)
any landfill or excavation of five hundred cubic yards throughout the total
lifetime of the fill or excavation.

(2) The
legislative authority of a county or city may raise the exemption levels
specified in subsection (1)(a) or (b) of this section by ordinance or
resolution to the following maximum levels within urban growth areas: (a)
Construction of or location of any residential structures of a maximum of
twenty or fewer dwelling units; and (b) construction of an office, school,
commercial, recreational, service, or storage building with a maximum of twelve
thousand or fewer square feet of gross floor area, and with associated parking for
forty or fewer automobiles.

--- END ---