BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF
WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec.
1. A person, as defined in
RCW 77.08.010, other than a natural person, is entitled to a refund equal to
the 1999 annual license fee for a resident emerging commercial fishery license
and a Puget Sound shrimp pot experimental fishery permit if a person:

(1) Held an emerging
commercial fishery license and a Puget Sound shrimp pot experimental fishery
permit in 1999; and

(2) Paid an additional
license fee for a resident emerging commercial fishery license and a Puget
Sound shrimp pot experimental fishery permit in 1999 for the purpose of
obtaining a license as a natural person.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 2. The sum of three thousand
dollars, or as much thereof as may be necessary, is appropriated for the fiscal
year ending June 30, 2002, from the general fund to the department of fish and
wildlife for the purpose of providing a refund to persons who paid an
additional license fee as described in section 1 of this act.

---
END ---