BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF
WASHINGTON:

_4 NEW SECTION. Sec. 1. A new section is
added to chapter 31.12

_5 RCW to read as follows:

_6 (1) Directors and committee members at a credit
union or

_7 federal credit union have no personal liability for harm
caused by

_8 acts or omissions performed on behalf of the credit
union if: The

_9 director or committee member was acting within the scope
of his or

10 her duties at the time of the act or omission; the harm
was not

11 caused by an act in violation of RCW 31.12.267; the harm
was not

12 caused by willful or criminal misconduct, gross
negligence,

13 reckless misconduct, or a conscious, flagrant
indifference to the

14 rights or safety of the individual harmed; and the harm
was not

15 caused by the director or committee member's operation
of a motor

16 vehicle, vessel, aircraft, or other vehicle for which
the state

17 requires the operator or the owner of the vehicle,
craft, or

p. 1 SHB
1537

_1 vessel to either possess an operator's license or
maintain

_2 insurance.

_3 (2) This section does not affect a director's or
committee

_4 member's liability to the credit union or to a
governmental entity

_5 for harm to the credit union or governmental entity
caused by the

_6 director or committee member.

_7 (3) This section does not affect the vicarious
liability of the

_8 credit union with respect to harm caused to any person,
including

_9 harm caused by the negligence of a director or committee
member.

10 (4) This section does not affect the liability of
employees of

11 the credit union for acts or omissions done within the
scope of

12 their employment.

‑‑‑ END ‑‑‑

SHB 1537 p. 2