BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF
WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1. RCW 74.09.522 and 1997 c
59 s 15 and 1997 c 34 s 1 are each reenacted and amended to read as follows:

(1) For the purposes of
this section, "managed health care system" means any health care
organization, including health care providers, insurers, health care service
contractors, health maintenance organizations, health insuring organizations,
or any combination thereof, that provides directly or by contract health care
services covered under RCW 74.09.520 and rendered by licensed providers, on a
prepaid capitated basis and that meets the requirements of section
1903(m)(1)(A) of Title XIX of the federal social security act or federal
demonstration waivers granted under section 1115(a) of Title XI of the federal
social security act.

(2) The department of
social and health services shall enter into agreements with managed health care
systems to provide health care services to recipients of temporary assistance for
needy families under the following conditions:

(a) Agreements shall be
made for at least thirty thousand recipients statewide;

(b) Agreements in at
least one county shall include enrollment of all recipients of temporary
assistance for needy families;

(c) To the extent that
this provision is consistent with section 1903(m) of Title XIX of the federal
social security act or federal demonstration waivers granted under section
1115(a) of Title XI of the federal social security act, recipients shall have a
choice of systems in which to enroll and shall have the right to terminate
their enrollment in a system: PROVIDED, That the department may limit
recipient termination of enrollment without cause to the first month of a
period of enrollment, which period shall not exceed twelve months: AND
PROVIDED FURTHER, That the department shall not restrict a recipient's right to
terminate enrollment in a system for good cause as established by the
department by rule;

(d) To the extent that
this provision is consistent with section 1903(m) of Title XIX of the federal
social security act, participating managed health care systems shall not enroll
a disproportionate number of medical assistance recipients within the total
numbers of persons served by the managed health care systems, except as
authorized by the department under federal demonstration waivers granted under
section 1115(a) of Title XI of the federal social security act;

(e) Except to the
extent provided in section 2 of this act, in negotiating with managed
health care systems the department shall adopt a uniform procedure to negotiate
and enter into contractual arrangements, including standards regarding the
quality of services to be provided; and financial integrity of the responding
system;

(f) The department
shall seek waivers from federal requirements as necessary to implement this
chapter;

(g) The department
shall, wherever possible, enter into prepaid capitation contracts that include
inpatient care. However, if this is not possible or feasible, the department
may enter into prepaid capitation contracts that do not include inpatient care;

(h) The department
shall define those circumstances under which a managed health care system is
responsible for out-of-plan services and assure that recipients shall not be
charged for such services; and

(i) Nothing in this
section prevents the department from entering into similar agreements for other
groups of people eligible to receive services under this chapter.

(3) The department
shall ensure that publicly supported community health centers and providers in
rural areas, who show serious intent and apparent capability to participate as
managed health care systems are seriously considered as contractors. The
department shall coordinate its managed care activities with activities under
chapter 70.47 RCW.

(4) The department
shall work jointly with the state of Oregon and other states in this
geographical region in order to develop recommendations to be presented to the
appropriate federal agencies and the United States congress for improving
health care of the poor, while controlling related costs.

(5) The legislature
finds that competition in the managed health care marketplace is enhanced, in
the long term, by the existence of a large number of managed health care system
options for medicaid clients. In a managed care delivery system, whose goal is
to focus on prevention, primary care, and improved enrollee health status,
continuity in care relationships is of substantial importance, and disruption
to clients and health care providers should be minimized. To help ensure these
goals are met, the following principles shall guide the department in its
healthy options managed health care purchasing efforts:

(a) All managed health
care systems should have an opportunity to contract with the department to the
extent that minimum contracting requirements defined by the department are met,
at payment rates that enable the department to operate as far below
appropriated spending levels as possible, consistent with the principles
established in this section.

(b) Managed health care
systems should compete for the award of contracts and assignment of medicaid
beneficiaries who do not voluntarily select a contracting system, based upon:

(i) Demonstrated
commitment to or experience in serving low-income populations;

(ii) Quality of
services provided to enrollees;

(iii) Accessibility,
including appropriate utilization, of services offered to enrollees;

(iv) Demonstrated
capability to perform contracted services, including ability to supply an
adequate provider network;

(v) Payment rates; and

(vi) The ability to
meet other specifically defined contract requirements established by the
department, including consideration of past and current performance and
participation in other state or federal health programs as a contractor.

(c) Consideration
should be given to using multiple year contracting periods.

(d) Quality,
accessibility, and demonstrated commitment to serving low-income populations
shall be given significant weight in the contracting, evaluation, and
assignment process.

(e) All contractors
that are regulated health carriers must meet state minimum net worth
requirements as defined in applicable state laws. The department shall adopt
rules establishing the minimum net worth requirements for contractors that are
not regulated health carriers. This subsection does not limit the authority of
the department to take action under a contract upon finding that a contractor's
financial status seriously jeopardizes the contractor's ability to meet its
contract obligations.

(f) Procedures for resolution
of disputes between the department and contract bidders or the department and
contracting carriers related to the award of, or failure to award, a managed
care contract must be clearly set out in the procurement document. In
designing such procedures, the department shall give strong consideration to
the negotiation and dispute resolution processes used by the Washington state
health care authority in its managed health care contracting activities.

(6) The department may
apply the principles set forth in subsection (5) of this section to its managed
health care purchasing efforts on behalf of clients receiving supplemental
security income benefits to the extent appropriate.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
2. (1) The department of
social and health services shall design and implement a pilot project to
contract with health carriers, as defined in RCW 48.43.005, in partnership with
managed health care systems that are not health carriers, to provide health
care services for recipients of temporary assistance for needy families, for
pregnant women, and for nondisabled children eligible under current
categorically needy medical assistance programs.

(2) The pilot project
shall contract with health carriers, as defined in RCW 48.43.005, in
partnership with managed health care systems that are not health carriers for
two calendar years, beginning January 1, 2002, in up to two counties. One
county shall be a rural county in western Washington.

(3) Any contract
entered into under this section must include:

(a) The enrollee
protections stated in RCW 74.09.522(2)(c), and standards regarding the delivery
or quality of services provided that are applicable to managed health care
systems contracting under RCW 74.09.522. Full accountability for compliance
with these standards rests with the managed health care system that is not a
health carrier. The health carrier may not be held accountable for compliance
with these standards; and

(b) Clear delineation
of the financial accountability of the health carrier and the managed health
care system that is not a health carrier. The managed health care system is
responsible for maintaining reserves adequate to pay any claims associated with
persons enrolled in the managed health care system through the contracts
authorized in this section. The level of reserves to be maintained must be
actuarially determined prior to execution of the contract, and must include a
requirement for maintaining an adequate surplus in the event that actual claims
experience exceeds that initially anticipated. The managed health care system
is primarily responsible for payment of claims associated with persons enrolled
through the contracts authorized in this section. In the event of insolvency
of the managed health care system, the carrier is secondarily responsible for
payment of these claims.

(4) The activities and
operations of the department of social and health services under this section,
including those of the managed health care systems contracting with the department
under this section, are exempt from the provisions and requirements of Title 48
RCW, except managed health care systems are subject to the provisions of RCW
48.43.500, 70.02.045, 48.43.505 through 48.43.535, 43.70.235, 48.43.545,
48.43.550, 70.02.110, and 70.02.900.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 3. This act is necessary for
the immediate preservation of the public peace, health, or safety, or support
of the state government and its existing public institutions, and takes effect
immediately.

---
END ---