BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF
WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1. RCW 42.17.319 and 1999 c
150 s 1 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) Notwithstanding the
provisions of RCW 42.17.260 through 42.17.340, the following information
supplied to the department of community, trade, and economic development ((by
any person in connection with the siting, recruitment, expansion, retention, or
relocation of that person's business shall not be made available to the public
by the department or the office of the governor)) is exempt from
disclosure under this chapter:

(a) Financial and
proprietary information collected from any person and provided to the
department of community, trade, and economic development pursuant to RCW
43.330.050(8) and 43.330.080(4); and

(b) Financial or
proprietary information((;)) collected from any person and provided
to the department or the office of the governor in connection with the siting,
recruitment, expansion, retention, or relocation of that person's business
and (((b))) until a siting decision is made, identifying
information of any person supplying information under this section and the
locations being considered for siting, relocation, or expansion of a business.

(2) Any work product
developed by the department based on information as described in subsection
(1)(a) of this section is not exempt from disclosure.

(3) For the
purposes of this section, "siting decision" means the decision to
acquire or not to acquire a site.

(((3))) (4)
If there is no written contact for a period of sixty days to the department
from a person connected with siting, recruitment, expansion, retention, or
relocation of that person's business, information described in subsection
(1)(b) of this section will be available to the public under the provisions of
RCW 42.17.250 through 42.17.340.

(((4)))
(5) Nothing in this section shall apply to records of any other state
agency or of a local agency.

--- END ---