BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF
WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec.
1. A new section is added
to chapter 29.81 RCW to read as follows:

(1) The director of
financial management, in consultation with the secretary of state and the
legislative fiscal committees, shall prepare a fiscal impact statement for each
of the following state ballot measures:

(a) An initiative to
the people that is certified to the ballot;

(b) An initiative to
the legislature that will appear on the ballot;

(c) An alternative
measure appearing on the ballot that the legislature proposes to an initiative
to the legislature;

(d) A referendum bill
referred to voters by the legislature; and

(e) A referendum
measure appearing on the ballot.

(2) Fiscal impact
statements must be written in clear and concise language and avoid legal and
technical terms when possible, and they may include easily understood graphics.

(3) A fiscal impact
statement must describe any projected increase or decrease in revenues, costs,
expenditures, or indebtedness that the state or any local government will
experience if the ballot measure is approved by state voters. Where
appropriate, a fiscal impact statement may include both estimated dollar
amounts and a description placing the estimated dollar amounts into context.

(4) A fiscal impact
statement must include both a summary of not to exceed one hundred words and a
more detailed statement that includes the assumptions that were made to develop
the fiscal impacts.

(5) Fiscal impact
statements must be available online from the secretary of state's web site and
included in the state voters' pamphlet.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
2. A new section is added
to chapter 29.81 RCW to read as follows:

(1) For initiatives to
the people that are certified to the ballot, initiatives to the legislature
that will appear on the ballot, and for any alternative measure appearing on
the ballot that the legislature proposes to an initiative to the legislature, the
director of financial management shall certify whether or not the measure has a
projected substantial fiscal impact on the state or any local government. The
director shall make the certification after preparing the fiscal impact
statement required by section 1 of this act.

(2)(a) For purposes of
this section, a measure has "substantial fiscal impact" if the fiscal
impact statement prepared by the office of financial management determines that
the measure would result in any of the following, either in the fiscal year in
which the measure takes effect or in the following fiscal year:

(i) The revenues of any
state or any local government fund are increased or decreased by the lesser of
(A) twenty million dollars or (B) ten percent of the fund's revenue in the
prior fiscal year; or

(ii) The measure
obligates the state or any local government to incur from any fund expenditures
in excess of the lesser of (A) twenty million dollars or (B) ten percent of the
fund's revenue in the prior fiscal year.

(b) For the fiscal year
beginning July 1, 2002, and for each fiscal year thereafter, the amounts in
(a)(i)(A) and (ii)(A) of this subsection shall increase by the fiscal growth
factor in RCW 43.135.025(7).

Sec. 3. RCW 29.81.250 and 1999 c
260 s 5 are each amended to read as follows:

The secretary of state
shall determine the format and layout of the voters' pamphlet. The secretary
of state shall print the pamphlet in clear, readable type on a size, quality,
and weight of paper that in the judgment of the secretary of state best serves
the voters. The pamphlet must contain a table of contents. Federal and state
offices must appear in the pamphlet in the same sequence as they appear on the
ballot. Measures and arguments must be printed in the order specified by RCW
29.79.300.

The voters' pamphlet
must provide the following information for each statewide issue on the ballot:

(1) The legal
identification of the measure by serial designation or number;

(2) The official ballot
title of the measure;

(3) A statement
prepared by the attorney general explaining the law as it presently exists;

(4) A statement
prepared by the attorney general explaining the effect of the proposed measure
if it becomes law;

(5) A fiscal impact
statement prepared by the director of financial management under section 1 of
this act, along with a statement of whether or not the office of financial
management certified the measure's fiscal impact to be substantial as defined
in section 2(2) of this act;

(6) For measures
listed in section 2(1) of this act for which the office of financial management
has certified a substantial fiscal impact as defined in section 2(2) of this
act, a statement of whether passage of the measure requires more than a
majority of the votes cast thereon, pursuant to Article II, section 1 of the
state Constitution;

(7) The total
number of votes cast for and against the measure in the senate and house of
representatives, if the measure has been passed by the legislature;

(((6))) (8)
An argument advocating the voters' approval of the measure together with any
statement in rebuttal of the opposing argument;

(((7))) (9)
An argument advocating the voters' rejection of the measure together with any
statement in rebuttal of the opposing argument;

(((8))) (10)
Each argument or rebuttal statement must be followed by the names of the
committee members who submitted them, and may be followed by a telephone number
that citizens may call to obtain information on the ballot measure;

(((9))) (11)
The full text of each measure.

Sec. 4. RCW 29.81.270 and 1999 c
260 s 7 are each amended to read as follows:

The
secretary of state shall adopt rules setting deadlines for submitting candidate
statements, candidate photographs, arguments, rebuttals, fiscal impact
statements, certifications of substantial fiscal impact, and explanatory
statements. The secretary of state shall also adopt rules setting deadlines
for filing ballot titles for referendum bills or constitutional amendments if
none have been provided by the legislature.

---
END ---