BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF
WASHINGTON:

_5 Sec. 1. RCW
48.17.090 and 1982 c 181 s 6 are each amended to read

_6 as follows:

_7 (1) Application for any such license shall be made
to the

_8 commissioner upon forms as prescribed and furnished by
((him)) the

_9 commissioner. As a part of or in connection with
any such

10 application the applicant shall furnish information
concerning his

11 or her identity, including ((his))
fingerprints, personal history,

12 experience, business record, purposes, and other
pertinent facts,

13 as the commissioner may reasonably require.

14 (2) Persons resident in the United States but not
in Washington

15 may apply for such a license on a form prepared by
the national

16 association of insurance commissioners or others, if
those forms

17 are approved by the commissioner by rule. An
applicant shall also

p. 1 HB
1547

_1 furnish any other information required to be
submitted but not

_2 provided for in that form.

_3 (3) Any person willfully
misrepresenting any fact required to

_4 be disclosed in any such application shall be liable to
penalties

_5 as provided by this code.

_6 (((3))) (4) If in the process of
verifying fingerprints,

_7 business records, or other information the
commissioner's office

_8 incurs fees or charges from another governmental agency
or from a

_9 business firm, the amount of such fees or charges shall
be paid to

10 the commissioner's office by the applicant and shall be
considered

11 the recovery of a previous expenditure.

12 Sec. 2. RCW
48.17.330 and 1973 1st ex.s. c 107 s 1 are each

13 amended to read as follows:

14 (1) The commissioner may license as an agent or as a
broker, a

15 person ((who is otherwise qualified therefor under
this code but))

16 who is not a resident of or domiciled in this state and
who holds

17 a corresponding license issued by the state or
province of his or

18 her residence or domicile, subject to RCW 48.17.530,
if by the

19 laws of the state or province of his or her
residence or domicile

20 a similar privilege is extended to residents of or
corporations

21 domiciled in this state. As used in this section,
"state" means a

22 state of the United States, the District of Columbia,
any

23 territory of the United States, Puerto Rico, Guam,
American Samoa,

24 the Trust Territory of the Pacific Islands, the
Virgin Islands,

25 and the Northern Mariana Islands; and
"province" means a province

26 of Canada.

27 (2) Any such licensee shall be subject to the same
obligations

28 and limitations, and to the commissioner's supervision
as though

29 resident or domiciled in this state, subject to RCW
48.14.040.

30 (3) No such person shall be so licensed unless he or
she files

31 the power of attorney provided for in RCW 48.17.340,
and, if a

32 corporation, it must have complied with the laws of this
state

33 governing the admission of foreign corporations.

‑‑‑ END ‑‑‑

HB 1547 p. 2