BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF
WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1. RCW 70.155.030 and 1994
c 202 s 1 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) No person
shall sell or permit to be sold any tobacco product through any device that
mechanically dispenses tobacco products unless the device is located fully
within premises from which minors are prohibited or in industrial worksites
where minors are not employed and not less than ten feet from all entrance or
exit ways to and from each premise. The board shall adopt rules that allow an
exception to the requirement that a device be located not less than ten feet
from all entrance or exit ways to and from a premise if it is architecturally
impractical for the device to be located not less than ten feet from all
entrance and exit ways.

(2) Except as
provided in subsection (1) of this section, beginning January 1, 2003,
self-service displays of tobacco products are prohibited. All in-store tobacco
products must be sold from behind the counter or from within locked display
units. This section does not apply to retailers who sell tobacco products
exclusively or primarily. For the purposes of this section the liquor control
board has discretion to determine whether a retailer sells tobacco products
exclusively or primarily. Further, this section does not apply to sales from
within premises where minors are prohibited by statute.

Sec. 2. RCW 70.155.040 and 1993
c 507 s 5 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) No person
shall sell or permit to be sold cigarettes not in the original unopened package
or container to which the stamps required by RCW 82.24.060 have been affixed.

(2) Packages of
fewer than twenty cigarettes may be sold only in premises where minors are
prohibited by statute.

(3) This section
does not apply to the sale of loose leaf tobacco by a retail business that
generates a minimum of sixty percent of annual gross sales from the sale of
tobacco products.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 3. If any provision of this
act or its application to any person or circumstance is held invalid, the
remainder of the act or the application of the provision to other persons or
circumstances is not affected.

---
END ---