BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF
WASHINGTON:

PART I

PRESERVE BLANKET PRIMARIES

Sec. 1. RCW 29.18.200 and 1990 c
59 s 88 are each amended to read as follows:

A primary must be
held in all instances for each partisan office, other than the offices of
president and vice-president of the United States, if at least one person has
filed a declaration and affidavit of candidacy as an independent candidate or
minor party candidate for the partisan office or if at least one person is
certified as a candidate of a major political party for the partisan office.
Except as provided otherwise in chapter 29.19 RCW, primaries for partisan
offices must be conducted as blanket primaries where all properly
registered voters may vote for their choices at ((any)) the
primary ((held under this title,)) for any candidate for each partisan
elective office, regardless of political affiliation and without ((a
declaration of)) declaring political faith or adherence ((on the
part of the voter)).

PART II

VOLUNTARY PARTY REGISTRATION

NEW SECTION. Sec.
2. A new section is added
to chapter 29.07 RCW to read as follows:

A system of voluntary
party registration is established for Washington state. Each person who
registers to vote must be given a separate document for voluntarily registering
as a member of any political party or for voluntarily changing or canceling his
or her political party membership. Each voter who is provided with a ballot
for a primary or general election must be given a separate document for
voluntarily registering as a member of any political party or for voluntarily
changing or canceling his or her political party membership. Registering as a
member of a political party automatically cancels any prior registration as a
member of another political party.

Any document for a
voter registering as a party member, or for changing or canceling party
membership, must include a clear and concise statement indicating that these
actions are completely voluntary. The statement must be in bold print of a
large font. Party membership is not a condition of eligibility to vote at a
primary or election. Party registration records are public records subject to
disclosure under chapter 42.17 RCW.

PART III

CANDIDATE CERTIFICATION

NEW SECTION. Sec.
3. A new section is added
to chapter 29.42 RCW to read as follows:

A major political party
may select and certify one or more candidates for each partisan office and file
the certification with the appropriate filing officer along with paying the
applicable filing fee for each person so certified. The selection of candidates
must be made according to rules adopted by the state central committee or
comparable statewide body of the major political party. The rules applicable
to the selection of candidates by a major political party for a particular
primary are the rules that the party has on file with the secretary of state as
of sixty days before the earliest date when a declaration and affidavit of
candidacy and certifications of candidates by major political parties may be
filed for that primary. A party's rules must allow a party member seeking to
be certified as one of the party's candidates for a partisan office, at his or
her option, to use either a petition method or a convention process to gain the
certification. The rules for both a petition method and convention process
must be uniform throughout the state for nominating candidates for each of the
following types of partisan office, but may vary among these different types of
partisan office: (1) United States senate; (2) United States house of
representatives; (3) state offices elected on a statewide basis; (4) state
legislative offices; and (5) county offices. A registered party member who is
eligible to sign a petition must be allowed to sign separate petitions for
different candidates for the same office. Each registered party member who is
eligible to vote at a convention to select a candidate must be allowed to vote
for each person seeking the nomination for the same office. Each person who
obtains the necessary petition or convention approval to be certified as a
candidate of a major political party for a partisan office must be included in
the list of candidates who are certified to the appropriate filing officer.

Sec. 4. RCW 29.15.010 and 1990 c
59 s 82 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) A ((candidate))
person who desires to have his or her name printed on the ballot for
election to ((an)) a nonpartisan office where ownership of property
is not a prerequisite to vote, or who desires to have his or her name printed
on the ballot as an independent candidate or minor party candidate for election
to a partisan office, other than president of the United States((,))
or vice-president of the United States, ((or an office for which
ownership of property is a prerequisite to voting)) shall complete and file
a declaration and affidavit of candidacy for the office. The secretary
of state shall adopt, by rule, a ((declaration of candidacy)) separate
form for candidates for the office of precinct committee officer and a
((separate)) standard form for candidates for all other offices filing
under this chapter. Included on the standard form ((shall)) must
be:

(((1))) (a)
A place for the candidate to declare that he or she is a registered voter
within the jurisdiction of the office for which he or she is filing, and the
address at which he or she is registered;

(((2))) (b)
A place for the candidate to indicate the position for which he or she is
filing;

(((3))) (c)
A place for the candidate to indicate ((a party designation)) his or
her status as an independent candidate or minor party candidate who is not a
registered member of a major political party, if applicable;

(((4))) (d)
A place for the candidate to indicate the amount of the filing fee accompanying
the declaration and affidavit of candidacy or for the candidate to
indicate that he or she is filing a nominating petition in lieu of the filing
fee under RCW 29.15.050;

(((5))) (e)
A place for the candidate to sign the declaration and affidavit of
candidacy, stating that the information provided on the form is true and
swearing or affirming that he or she will support the Constitution and laws of
the United States and the Constitution and laws of the state of Washington((.

The secretary of
state may require)); and

(f) Any other
information ((on the form he or she)) that the secretary of state
deems appropriate to facilitate the filing process.

(2) A major
political party desiring to have one or more names of registered members of
that political party printed on the ballot as candidates from that political
party for a partisan office, other than president of the United States or
vice-president of the United States, may select and certify the name or names
of the candidates to the appropriate filing officer along with paying the
applicable filing fee for each person so certified. The process for a major
political party to select the names of its candidates must be in accordance
with section 3 of this act. The certification of candidates must include
information the secretary of state deems appropriate.

Sec. 5. RCW 29.15.020 and 1990 c
59 s 81 are each amended to read as follows:

Except where otherwise
provided by this title, declarations and affidavits of candidacy, and
certifications of candidates for partisan offices from major political parties,
for the following offices ((shall)) must be filed during regular
business hours with the filing officer no earlier than the fourth Monday in
July and no later than the following Friday in the year in which the office is
scheduled to be voted upon:

(1) Offices that are
scheduled to be voted upon for full terms or both full terms and short terms
at, or in conjunction with, a state general election; and

(2) Offices where a
vacancy, other than a short term, exists that has not been filled by election
and for which an election to fill the vacancy is required in conjunction with
the next state general election.

This section supersedes
all other statutes that provide for a different filing period for these
offices.

Sec. 6. RCW 29.15.025 and 1999 c
298 s 9 are each amended to read as follows:

(1)(a) A person
filing a declaration and affidavit of candidacy for ((an)) a
nonpartisan office shall, at the time of filing, be a registered voter and
possess the qualifications specified by law for persons who may be elected to
the office.

(b) A person filing
a declaration and affidavit of candidacy as an independent candidate or minor
party candidate for a partisan office must, at the time of the filing be a
registered voter and possess the qualifications specified by law for persons
who may be elected to the partisan office, but may not be a registered member
of another political party.

(c) Each person
listed on a certification of candidates for a partisan office from a major
political party must, at the time of filing or certification, be a registered
member of that political party, be a registered voter, and possess the
qualifications specified by law for persons who may be elected to the partisan
office.

(2) The name of a
candidate for an office shall not appear on a ballot for that office unless,
except as provided in RCW 3.46.067 and 3.50.057, the candidate is, at the time
the candidate's declaration and affidavit of candidacy is filed or at the
time the certification of candidates from his or her major political party is
filed, properly registered to vote in the geographic area represented by
the office. For the purposes of this section, each geographic area in which
registered voters may cast ballots for an office is represented by that
office. If a person elected to an office must be nominated from a district or
similar division of the geographic area represented by the office, the name of
a candidate for the office shall not appear on a primary ballot for that office
unless the candidate is, at the time the candidate's declaration and affidavit
of candidacy is filed or at the time the certification of candidates from
his or her major political party is filed, properly registered to vote in
that district or division. The officer with whom declarations and affidavits
of candidacy and certifications of candidates from major political parties
must be filed under this title shall review each ((such)) declaration ((filed
regarding)) and affidavit of candidacy and each certification of the
names of candidates from a major political party to determine compliance
with this subsection.

(3) ((This section
does)) As provided in Article I, section 2, paragraph 2, of the United
States Constitution, the residency requirements of this section do not
apply to candidates for the office of a member of the United States
congress.

Sec. 7. RCW 29.15.040 and 1987 c
110 s 2 are each amended to read as follows:

Any candidate may mail
his or her declaration and affidavit of candidacy for an office , and
any major political party may mail its certification of candidates for partisan
offices, to the appropriate filing officer. ((Such)) Declarations
and affidavits of candidacy ((shall)) and certifications of
candidates must be processed by the filing officer in the following manner:

(1) Any declaration and
affidavit of candidacy, or certification of candidates, received by the
filing officer by mail before the tenth business day immediately preceding the
first day for candidates to file for office ((shall)) must be
returned to the candidate or major political party submitting it,
together with a notification that the declaration and affidavit of
candidacy or certification of candidates was received too early to be
processed. The candidate ((shall)) must then be permitted to
resubmit his or her declaration and affidavit of candidacy, and the
major political party may resubmit its certification of candidates, during
the filing period.

(2) Any properly
executed declaration and affidavit of candidacy, or certification of
candidates from a major political party, received by mail on or after the
tenth business day immediately preceding the first day for candidates to file
for office and before the close of business on the last day of the filing
period ((shall)) must be included with filings made in person
during the filing period. In partisan and judicial elections the filing
officer shall determine by lot the order in which the names of those candidates
((shall)) will appear upon sample and absentee primary ballots.

(3) Any declaration and
affidavit of candidacy, or certification of candidates from a major
political party, received by the filing officer after the close of business
on the last day for candidates to file for office ((shall)) must
be rejected and returned to the candidate or major political party
attempting to file it.

Sec. 8. RCW 29.15.230 and 1981 c
180 s 2 are each amended to read as follows:

Filings for a partisan
elective office ((shall)) must be opened for a period of three
normal business days whenever, on or after the first day of the regular filing
period and before the fourth Tuesday prior to a primary, a vacancy occurs in
that office, leaving an unexpired term to be filled by an election for which
filings have not been held.

((Any such)) The
special three-day filing period ((shall)) must be fixed by the
election officer with whom declarations and affidavits of candidacy,
and certification of candidates from major political parties, for that
office are filed. The election officer shall give notice of the special
three-day filing period by notifying the press, radio, and television in the
county or counties involved, and by such other means as may be required by law.

Candidacies validly
filed within the special three-day filing period shall appear on the primary
ballot as if filed or certified during the regular filing period.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
9. RCW 29.18.150 (Vacancies on major party
ticket caused by no filing--How filled) and 1990 c 59 s 102, 1977 ex.s. c 329 s
12, & 1965 c 9 s 29.18.150 are each repealed.

PART
IV

WRITE-IN CANDIDATES

Sec. 10. RCW 29.04.180 and 1999 c
157 s 1 are each amended to read as follows:

Any person who desires
to be a write-in candidate and have such votes counted at a primary or election
may, if the jurisdiction of the office sought is entirely within one county,
file a declaration of candidacy with the county auditor not later than the day
before the primary or election. However, except as provided under RCW
29.62.180 for candidates of a major political party appointed to fill a vacancy
by death or disqualification, a write-in vote for a partisan office may only be
cast for an independent candidate or minor party candidate. If the
jurisdiction of the office sought encompasses more than one county the
declaration of candidacy shall be filed with the secretary of state not later
than the day before the primary or election. Declarations of candidacy for
write-in candidates must be accompanied by a filing fee in the same manner as
required of other candidates filing for the office as provided in RCW
29.15.050.

Votes cast for write-in
candidates who have filed ((such)) declarations of candidacy ((and
write-in votes for persons appointed by political parties pursuant to RCW
29.18.160)) need only specify the name of the candidate in the appropriate
location on the ballot in order to be counted. Write-in votes cast for any
other candidate, in order to be counted, must designate the office sought ((and)),
position number ((or)) if applicable, and independent status or minor
political party((,)) if applicable. In order for write-in votes to be
valid in jurisdictions employing optical-scan mark sense ballot systems the
voter must complete the proper mark next to the write-in line for that office.

No person may file as a
write-in candidate where:

(1) At a general
election, the person attempting to file either filed as a write-in candidate
for the same office at the preceding primary or the person's name appeared on
the ballot for the same office at the preceding primary;

(2) The person
attempting to file as a write-in candidate has already filed a valid write-in
declaration for that primary or election, unless one or the other of the two
filings is for the office of precinct committeeperson;

(3) The name of the
person attempting to file already appears on the ballot as a candidate for
another office, unless one of the two offices for which he or she is a
candidate is precinct committeeperson.

The declaration of
candidacy shall be similar to that required by RCW 29.15.010. No write-in
candidate filing under RCW 29.04.180 may be included in any voter's pamphlet
produced under chapter ((29.80)) 29.81 RCW unless that candidate
qualifies to have his or her name printed on the general election ballot. The
legislative authority of any jurisdiction producing a local voter's pamphlet
under chapter 29.81A RCW may provide, by ordinance, for the inclusion of
write-in candidates in ((such)) the pamphlets.

Sec. 11. RCW 29.51.173 and 1993 c
1 s 6 are each amended to read as follows:

Nothing in RCW
43.01.015, 44.04.015, 29.68.015, or 29.68.016 prohibits a qualified voter of
this state from casting a ballot for any person by writing the name of that
person on the ballot in accordance with RCW ((29.51.170)) 29.62.180
or from having ((such a)) the ballot counted or tabulated, nor
does anything in RCW 43.01.015, 44.04.015, 29.68.015, or 29.68.016 prohibit a
person from standing or campaigning for an elective office by means of a
write-in campaign. However, except as provided under RCW 29.62.180 for
candidates of a major political party appointed to fill a vacancy by death or
disqualification, a write-in vote for a partisan office may only be cast for an
independent candidate or minor party candidate.

Sec. 12. RCW 29.62.180 and 1999 c
157 s 3 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) For any office at
any election or primary, any voter may write in on the ballot the name of any
person for an office who has filed as a write-in candidate for the office in
the manner provided by RCW 29.04.180, and ((such)) the
vote ((shall)) must be counted the same as if the name had been
printed on the ballot and marked by the voter. A write-in ballot for a
partisan office may only be counted if the candidate is an independent
candidate or a minor party candidate. However, if a major political party
appoints a candidate under RCW 29.18.160 to fill a vacancy by death or
disqualification, and the ballots have not been changed to reflect this
appointment, a write-in vote cast for the appointed candidate must be counted
for the appointed candidate along with the votes cast for the person whose name
is printed on the ballot as a candidate from that major political party but
otherwise would have been replaced by the appointed candidate if time had
permitted. No write-in vote made for any person who has not filed a
declaration of candidacy pursuant to RCW 29.04.180 is valid if that person
filed for the same office, either as a regular candidate or a write-in
candidate, at the preceding primary. Any abbreviation used to designate
office, position, or minor political party ((shall)) must
be accepted if the canvassing board can determine, to their satisfaction, the
voter's intent.

(2) The number of
write-in votes cast for each office must be recorded and reported with the
canvass for the election.

(3) Write-in votes cast
for an individual candidate for an office need not be tallied if the total
number of write-in votes cast for the office is not greater than the number of
votes cast for the candidate apparently nominated or elected, and the write-in
votes could not have altered the outcome of the primary or election. In the
case of write-in votes for statewide office or for any office whose
jurisdiction encompasses more than one county, write-in votes for an individual
candidate must be tallied whenever the county auditor is notified by either the
office of the secretary of state or another auditor in a multicounty
jurisdiction that it appears that the write-in votes could alter the outcome of
the primary or election.

(4) In the case of
statewide offices or jurisdictions that encompass more than one county, if the
total number of write-in votes cast for an office within a county is greater
than the number of votes cast for a candidate apparently nominated or elected
in a primary or election, the auditor shall tally all write-in votes for
individual candidates for that office and notify the office of the secretary of
state and the auditors of the other counties within the jurisdiction, that the
write-in votes for individual candidates should be tallied.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
13. Part headings used in
this act are not part of the law.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 14. This act is necessary for
the immediate preservation of the public peace, health, or safety, or support
of the state government and its existing public institutions, and takes effect
immediately.

---
END ---