BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF
WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1. RCW 39.10.065 and 1997 c
376 s 5 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) In addition to the
projects authorized in RCW 39.10.050 and 39.10.060, public bodies may use the
general contractor/construction manager or design-build procedure for
demonstration projects valued between three million dollars and ten million
dollars as follows:

(a) Three demonstration
projects by the department of general administration; and

(b) One demonstration
project by each of the public bodies authorized in RCW 39.10.020(2) other than
the department of general administration.

(2) Public bodies shall
give weight to proposers' experience working on projects valued between three
million dollars and ten million dollars in the evaluation process for the
selection of a general contractor/construction manager or design-build firm for
demonstration projects authorized in subsection (1) of this section.

(3) Cities which supply
water to over three hundred fifty thousand people may use the design-build
procedure for one water system demonstration project valued over ten million
dollars. Use of the design-build procedure shall be deemed to effect
compliance with the requirement for competitive bids under RCW 43.155.060.

(4) All contracts
authorized under this section must be entered into before July 1, ((1999))
2005.

(5) In the event that a
public body determines not to perform a demonstration project using its
authority under this section, it may transfer its authority to another public
body.

Sec. 2. RCW 39.10.110 and 1997 c
376 s 6 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) There is
established a ((temporary independent oversight)) public works
procurement committee to review the utilization of the alternative public
works contracting procedures authorized under this chapter, to evaluate
potential future utilization of other alternative contracting procedures,
including, but not limited to, contractor prequalification, and, if desired by
the committee, to review traditional public works contracting procedures used
by state agencies and municipalities. The committee shall also pursue the
development of a mentoring program for expansion of the authorities in this
chapter to other public bodies. The membership of the committee shall
include: Two members of the house of representatives, one from each major
caucus, appointed by the speaker of the house of representatives; two members
of the senate, one from each major caucus, appointed by the president of the
senate; representatives from the appropriate segments of the construction,
contracting, subcontracting, and design industries, appointed by the governor;
representatives from appropriate labor organizations, appointed by the
governor; representatives from public bodies authorized to use the alternative
public works contracting procedures under this chapter, appointed by the governor;
a representative from the office of minority and women's business enterprises,
appointed by the governor; and a representative from the office of financial
management, appointed by the governor. The governor shall maintain a balance
between representatives from public agencies and the private sector when
appointing members to the committee, and shall consider the recommendations of
the established organizations representing the construction, contracting,
subcontracting, and design industries and organized labor in making the
industry and labor appointments.

(2) ((The committee
shall meet beginning after July 1, 1994.)) A chair or cochairs shall be
selected from among the committee's membership. Staff support for the
committee shall be provided by the agencies and organizations represented on
the committee.

(3) Public bodies
utilizing the alternative contracting procedures authorized under this chapter
shall provide any requested information concerning implementation of projects
under this chapter to the committee in a timely manner, excepting any trade
secrets or proprietary information.

(4) The committee shall
report to the appropriate standing committees of the legislature by December ((10,
2000,)) 10th of each year concerning its findings and recommendations.

Sec. 3. 2000 c 138 s 106
(uncodified) is amended to read as follows:

A report on the use of
the small works roster shall be made to the ((independent oversight)) public
works procurement committee established under RCW 39.10.110 prior to the
2003 legislative session.

Sec. 4. RCW 39.10.115 and 2000 c
209 s 4 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) The school district
project review board is established to review school district proposals
submitted by school districts to use alternative public works contracting
procedures. The board shall select and approve qualified projects based upon
an evaluation of the information submitted by the school district under subsection
(2) of this section. The membership of the board shall be selected by the ((independent
oversight)) public works procurement committee as established under
RCW 39.10.110 and shall include the following representatives, each having
experience with public works or commercial construction: One representative
from the office of the superintendent of public instruction; one representative
from the office of financial management; two representatives from the
construction industry, one of whom works for a construction company with gross
annual revenues of twenty million dollars or less; one representative from the
specialty contracting industry; one representative from organized labor; one
representative from the design industry; one representative from a public body
previously authorized under this chapter to use an alternative public works
contracting procedure who has experience using such alternative contracting
procedures; one representative from school districts with ten thousand or more
annual average full-time equivalent pupils; and one representative from school
districts with fewer than ten thousand average full-time equivalent pupils.
Each member shall be appointed for a term of three years, with the first
three-year term commencing after June 8, 2000. Any member of the school
district project review board who is directly affiliated with any applicant
before the board must recuse him or herself from consideration of the
application.

(2) A school district
seeking to use alternative contracting procedures authorized under this chapter
shall file an application with the school district project review board. The
application form shall require the district to submit a detailed statement of
the proposed project, including the school district's name; student population
based upon October full-time equivalents; the current projected total budget
for the project, including the estimated construction costs, costs for
professional services, equipment and furnishing costs, off-site costs, contract
administration costs, and other related project costs; the anticipated project
design and construction schedule; a summary of the school district's
construction activity for the preceding six years; and an explanation of why
the school district believes the use of an alternative contracting procedure is
in the public interest and why the school district is qualified to use an
alternative contracting procedure, including a summary of the relevant
experience of the school district's management team. The applicant shall also
provide in a timely manner any other information concerning implementation of
projects under this chapter requested by the school district project review
board to assist in its consideration.

(3) Any school district
whose application is approved by the school district project review board shall
comply with the public notification and review requirements in RCW 39.10.030.

(4) Any school district
whose application is approved by the school district project review board shall
not use as an evaluation factor whether a contractor submitting a bid for the
approved project has had prior general contractor/construction manager
procedure experience.

(5) The school district
project review board shall prepare and issue a report reviewing the use of the
alternative public works contracting procedures by school districts. The board
shall report to the ((independent oversight)) public works
procurement committee at least sixty days before the ((oversight))
committee is required to report to the legislature under RCW 39.10.110(4).

Sec. 5. RCW 39.10.120 and 1997 c
376 s 7 and 1997 c 220 s 404 are each reenacted and amended to read as follows:

(1) Except as provided
in subsections (2) and (3) of this section, the alternative public works
contracting procedures authorized under this chapter are limited to public
works contracts signed before July 1, ((2001)) 2007. Methods of
public works contracting authorized by RCW 39.10.050 and 39.10.060 shall remain
in full force and effect until completion of contracts signed before July 1, ((2001))
2007.

(2) For the purposes of
a baseball stadium as defined in RCW 82.14.0485, the design-build contracting
procedures under RCW 39.10.050 shall remain in full force and effect until
completion of contracts signed before December 31, 1997.

(3) For the purposes of
a stadium and exhibition center, as defined in RCW 36.102.010, the design-build
contracting procedures under RCW 39.10.050 shall remain in full force and
effect until completion of contracts signed before December 31, 2002.

Sec. 6. RCW 39.10.902 and 1997 c
376 s 8 are each amended to read as follows:

The following acts or
parts of acts, as now existing or hereafter amended, are each repealed, effective
July 1, ((2001)) 2007:

(1) RCW 39.10.010 and
1994 c 132 s 1;

(2) RCW 39.10.020 and 2000
c 209 s 1, 1997 c 376 s 1, & 1994 c 132 s 2;

(3) RCW 39.10.030 and 1997
c 376 s 2 & 1994 c 132 s 3;

(4) RCW 39.10.040 and
1994 c 132 s 4;

(5) RCW 39.10.050 and 1997
c 376 s 3 & 1994 c 132 s 5;

(6) RCW 39.10.060 and 2000
c 209 s 2, 2000 c 194 s 1, 1997 c 376 s 4, 1996 c 18 s 6, & 1994 c 132
s 6;

(7) RCW 39.10.065 and section
1 of this act & 1997 c 376 s 5;

(8) RCW 39.10.070 and
1994 c 132 s 7;

(9) RCW 39.10.080 and
1994 c 132 s 8;

(10) RCW 39.10.090 and
1994 c 132 s 9;

(11) RCW 39.10.100 and
1994 c 132 s 10;

(12) RCW 39.10.110 and section
2 of this act, 1997 c 376 s 6, & 1994 c 132 s 11;

(13) RCW 39.10.900 and
1994 c 132 s 13; and

(14) RCW 39.10.901 and
1994 c 132 s 14((; and

(15) RCW 39.10.902
and 1994 c 132 s 15)).

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 7. This act is necessary for
the immediate preservation of the public peace, health, or safety, or support
of the state government and its existing public institutions, and takes effect
July 1, 2001.

---
END ---