BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF
WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec.
1. A new section is added
to chapter 29.36 RCW to read as follows:

An absentee ballot may
be tabulated only if the voter complied with all instructions, including the
voter signing the outer return identification envelope, and the absentee ballot
was returned to the county auditor who issued the absentee ballot as follows:

(1) If mailed from
anywhere in the United States, the absentee ballot must either: (a) Be
received by the county auditor no later than 8:00 p.m. on the day of the
primary or election for which it was issued; or (b) have a date of mailing on
or before the Friday immediately before the day of the primary or election for
which it was issued and be received by the county auditor no later than 12:00
noon on the day the primary or election results are certified; or

(2) If mailed by an
overseas voter or service voter, the absentee ballot must have a date of
mailing on or before the day of the election or primary for which it was issued
and be received by the county auditor no later than 12:00 noon on the day the
primary or election results are certified; or

(3) The absentee ballot
was deposited at a polling site in the county of the auditor who issued the
absentee ballot, during normal voting hours of the primary or election for
which it was issued; or

(4) The absentee ballot
was deposited with the county auditor who issued the absentee ballot no later
than 8:00 p.m. on the date of the primary or election for which it was issued.

The date of mailing is
the date of the postmark appearing on the outer return envelope. However, if
the postmark is missing or illegible, the date of mailing is the date a voter
attests to voting, as shown on the outer return envelope.

Sec. 2. RCW 29.36.045 and 1987 c
346 s 12 are each amended to read as follows:

The county auditor
shall send each absentee voter a ballot, an inner security envelope in
which to seal the ballot after voting, a larger outer return identification
envelope in which to return the security envelope, and instructions on how to
mark the ballot and how to return it to the county auditor so that the
ballot may be tabulated as provided under section 1 of this act. The ((larger))
outer return envelope shall contain a declaration by the absentee voter
reciting his or her qualifications and stating that he or she has not voted in
any other jurisdiction at this primary or election, together with a
summary of the penalties for any violation of any of the provisions of this
chapter. The outer return envelope shall provide space for the voter to
indicate the date on which the ballot was voted and for the voter to sign the
oath. A summary of the applicable penalty provisions of this chapter shall be
printed on the outer return envelope immediately adjacent to the space
for the voter's signature. The signature of the voter on the outer
return envelope shall affirm and attest to the statements regarding the
qualifications of that voter and to the validity of the ballot. For
out-of-state voters, overseas voters, and service voters, the signed
declaration on the return envelope constitutes the equivalent of a voter
registration for the election or primary for which the ballot has been issued.
((The voter shall be instructed to either return the ballot to the county
auditor by whom it was issued or attach sufficient first class postage, if
applicable, and mail the ballot to the appropriate county auditor no later than
the day of the election or primary for which the ballot was issued.))

Sec. 3. RCW 29.36.060 and 1991 c
81 s 32 are each amended to read as follows:

The opening and
subsequent processing of outer return identification envelopes
for any primary or election may begin on or after the tenth day ((prior to
such)) before the primary or election. The opening of the security
envelopes and tabulation of absentee ballots shall not commence until after
8:00 ((o'clock)) p.m. on the day of the primary or election.

After opening the outer
return envelopes, the county canvassing board or its representative
shall place all of the ((ballot)) inner security envelopes in
containers that can be secured with numbered seals. These sealed containers
shall be stored in a secure location until after 8:00 ((o'clock)) p.m.
of the day of the primary or election. However, absentee ballots that
are to be tabulated ((on)) by an electronic vote tallying system
may be taken from the inner security envelopes and all the normal
procedural steps may be performed to prepare these absentee ballots for
tabulation before sealing the absentee ballots in sealed containers.

The canvassing board or
its representative shall examine the postmark, statement, and signature on
each outer return envelope containing the inner security envelope
and absentee ballot((. They)) and shall verify that the voter's
signature is the same as that in the registration files for that voter. ((For
absentee voters other than out-of-state voters, overseas voters, and service
voters, if the postmark is illegible, the date on the return envelope to which
the voter attests shall determine the validity, as to the time of voting, of
that absentee ballot under this chapter. For any absentee voter,)) An
absentee ballot may only be counted if the proper voter signature on the outer
return envelope was made by no later than 8:00 p.m. on the primary or election
for which it was issued. A variation between the signature of the voter on
the outer return envelope and that in the registration files due to the
substitution of initials or the use of common nicknames is permitted so long as
the surname and handwriting are clearly the same.

Sec. 4. RCW 29.36.126 and 1993 c
417 s 4 are each amended to read as follows:

Upon receipt of the
mail ballot, the voter shall mark it, sign the outer return
identification envelope supplied with the ballot, and comply with the
instructions provided with the ballot. The voter may return the marked ballot
to the county auditor. ((The ballot must be returned in the return identification
envelope.)) If ((mailed)) returned by mail, a mail
ballot ((must be postmarked not later than the date of the election)) may
only be tabulated under the same conditions that an absentee ballot may be
tabulated if it is returned by mail. Otherwise, ((the)) a mail
ballot ((must be)) may be tabulated only if it was deposited at
the office of the county auditor no later than 8:00 p.m. on the date of the
primary or election for which it was issued or if it was deposited at
the designated place of deposit not later than 8:00 p.m. on the date of the primary
or election for which it was issued.

Sec. 5. RCW 29.36.139 and 1993 c
417 s 6 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) A mail ballot shall
be counted only if it is returned in the outer return identification
envelope as provided under RCW 29.36.126, if the outer return
envelope is signed by the registered voter to whom the ballot is issued, and if
the signature is verified ((as provided in this subsection. The county
auditor shall verify the signature of each voter on the return identification
envelope with the signature on the voter's registration record)) in the
same manner as a signature on the outer return envelope containing an absentee
ballot is verified under RCW 29.36.060. A person who votes or attempts to
vote more than once in a mail ballot election is subject to the penalties
provided in chapter 29.85 RCW.

(2) Any mail ballot may
be challenged in the same manner as an absentee ballot.

Sec. 6. RCW 29.62.020 and 1999 c
259 s 4 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) At least every
third day after a ((special election,)) primary((,)) or ((general))
election and before certification of the ((election)) results, except
Sundays and legal holidays, the county auditor shall convene the county
canvassing board or ((their)) its designees to process absentee
ballots and canvass the votes cast at that ((special election,))
primary((,)) or ((general)) election, if the county auditor is in
possession of more than twenty-five ballots that have yet to be canvassed. The
county auditor may use his or her discretion in determining when to convene the
canvassing board or ((their)) its designees during the final four
days before the certification of ((election)) results in order to
protect the secrecy of any ballot.

Each absentee ballot
previously not canvassed that was received by the county auditor two days or
more before the convening of the canvassing board or ((their)) its
designees and that either was received by the county auditor before the closing
of the polls on the day of the(( special election,)) primary((,))
or ((general)) election for which it was issued, or that bears a date of
mailing on or before the ((special election,)) primary((,)) or ((general))
election for which it was issued, must be processed at that time. The
tabulation of votes ((that results)) resulting from that day's
canvass must be made available to the general public immediately upon
completion of the canvass.

(2) On the tenth day
after a special election or a primary and on the fifteenth day after a general
election, the canvassing board shall complete the canvass and certify the
results. The canvass report must include each absentee ballot that was
((returned before the closing of the polls on the date of the primary or
election for which it was issued, and each absentee ballot with a date of mailing
on or before the date of the primary or election for which it was issued and
received on or before the date on which the primary or election is certified,
shall be included in the canvass report)) tabulated as provided under
section 1 of this act.

(3) At the
request of any major political party caucus of the state legislature,
the county auditor shall transmit copies of all unofficial returns of state and
legislative primaries or elections prepared by or for the county canvassing
board to either the secretary of the senate or the chief clerk of the house.

---
END ---