BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF
WASHINGTON:

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 1. The legislature finds
that the promotion of the public health, safety, and welfare of the occupants
and users of buildings and structures and the general public is accomplished
through the adoption of codes, standards, and regulations that regulate the construction,
reconstruction, and repair of residential, commercial, and industrial buildings
and structures. The legislature further finds that regulation of the
construction, reconstruction, and repair of residential, commercial, and
industrial buildings and structures is best accomplished through the
application of a statewide building code.

---
END ---