BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF
WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec.
1. A new section is added
to chapter 29.79 RCW to read as follows:

The office of financial
management, in consultation with the secretary of state, department of revenue,
other state agencies, selected local governments and associations of local
governments, and legislative fiscal staff, when appropriate, shall prepare a
fiscal note for each initiative to the people the petition for which has been
filed with the secretary of state under RCW 29.79.140(2) and for each
initiative to the legislature that will appear on the ballot, including a
separate fiscal note for any alternative measure appearing on the ballot that
is proposed by the legislature. A fiscal note must describe any projected
increases or decreases in revenues, costs, expenditures, or indebtedness that
the state and local governments will experience if the initiative or
alternative measure were approved by state voters. A fiscal note must include
a summary not exceeding one hundred words and a more detailed statement that
includes the assumptions that were made to develop the fiscal impacts. Fiscal
notes must be written in clear and concise language and avoid legal and
technical terms when possible, and may include easy to understand graphics.
Where appropriate, a fiscal note may include both estimated dollar amounts and
a description placing the estimated dollar amounts into context.

Fiscal notes must be
available on-line from the secretary of state's web site and be included in the
state voters' pamphlet.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
2. A new section is added
to chapter 29.81 RCW to read as follows:

In addition to other
information on an initiative required to be included in the voters' pamphlet,
the secretary of state shall include the fiscal note and responses to the
fiscal note prepared for the initiative under section 1 of this act. This
additional information must be presented highlighting the executive summary.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
3. A new section is added
to chapter 29.79 RCW to read as follows:

Both the committee
advocating approval of an initiative and the committee advocating rejection of
an initiative may submit responses to a fiscal note prepared under section 1 of
this act. Each response must be in two parts, with the first part being an
argument not to exceed two hundred fifty words in length, and the second part
being a rebuttal to the first part prepared by the other side not to exceed
seventy-five words in length. The responses must be prepared and processed in
a similar manner to the preparation and processing of arguments under RCW
29.81.290.

Sec. 4. RCW 29.81.280 and 1999 c
260 s 8 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) If in the opinion
of the secretary of state any argument or statement offered for inclusion in
the voters' pamphlet in support of or opposition to a measure or candidate,
or any response to a fiscal note, contains obscene matter or matter that is
otherwise prohibited by law from distribution through the mail, the secretary
may petition the superior court of Thurston County for a judicial determination
that the argument, response, or statement may be rejected for
publication or edited to delete the matter. The court shall not enter such an
order unless it concludes that the matter is obscene or otherwise prohibited
for distribution through the mail.

(2)(a) A person who
believes that he or she may be defamed by an argument, response, or
statement offered for inclusion in the voters' pamphlet in support of or
opposition to a measure or candidate may petition the superior court of
Thurston County for a judicial determination that the argument, response,
or statement may be rejected for publication or edited to delete the defamatory
((statement)) matter.

(b) The court shall not
enter such an order unless it concludes that the argument, response, or
statement is untrue and that the petitioner has a very substantial likelihood
of prevailing in a defamation action.

(c) An action under
this subsection (2) must be filed and served no later than the tenth day after
the deadline for the submission of the argument, response, or statement
to the secretary of state.

(d) If the secretary of
state notifies a person named or identified in an argument, response, or
statement of the contents of the argument, response, or statement within
three days after the deadline for submission to the secretary, then neither the
state nor the secretary is liable for damages resulting from publication of the
argument, response, or statement unless the secretary publishes the
argument, response, or statement in violation of an order entered under
this section. Nothing in this section creates a duty on the part of the
secretary of state to identify, locate, or notify the person.

(3) Parties to a
dispute under this section may agree to resolve the dispute by rephrasing the
argument, response, or statement, even if the deadline for submission to
the secretary has elapsed, unless the secretary determines that the process of
publication is too far advanced to permit the change. The secretary shall
promptly provide any such revision to any committee entitled to submit a
rebuttal argument or rebuttal response. If that committee has not yet
submitted its rebuttal, its deadline to submit a rebuttal is extended by five
days. If it has submitted a rebuttal, it may revise it to address the change
within five days of the filing of the revised argument with the secretary.

(4) In an
action under this section the committee or candidate must be named as a
defendant, and may be served with process by certified mail directed to the
address contained in the secretary's records for that party. The secretary of
state shall be a nominal party to an action brought under subsection (2) of
this section, solely for the purpose of determining the content of the voters'
pamphlet. The superior court shall give such an action priority on its
calendar.

---
END ---