BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF
WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec.
1. A new section is added
to chapter 36.28 RCW to read as follows:

No person, for an
illegal or wrongful purpose, and no association or organization may assume or
use the designation "sheriff" or any other title, designation, words,
letters, abbreviation, sign, or card intending to indicate that the person,
association, or organization is a county sheriff or deputy sheriff or is
associated with a county sheriff unless the person, association, or
organization is in fact a county sheriff or deputy sheriff or associated with a
county sheriff or unless authorized by the Washington association of sheriffs
and police chiefs. This section does not apply to the Washington council of
police and sheriffs or the council of metropolitan police and sheriffs.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
2. A new section is added
to chapter 36.28 RCW to read as follows:

No person,
for an illegal or wrongful purpose, and no group, entity, or association may
use the term "sheriff's posse" or in any way represent the person,
group, entity, or association as a "sheriff's posse" on any document,
publication, brochure, pamphlet, sign, poster, or other written material or
placard, including on a computer network web site, bulletin board, or chat
room, unless the person, group, entity, or association has the signed written
consent from the county sheriff to use the term or represent themselves as a
sheriff's posse for a specific purpose.

---
END ---