BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF
WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec.
1. The legislature finds
that since the shoreline management act was first adopted, a number of other
land use protections have been enacted by the legislature, including the
requirement under the growth management act for all counties and cities to
adopt ordinances that designate and protect critical areas. Under the growth
management act, the department of community, trade, and economic development
develops recommendations to local governments for meeting different
requirements under the act, but local governments may choose to make different
decisions than those developed by the department and still remain in compliance
with the act. The legislature finds that under the growth management act,
counties and cities have developed the capacity to make decisions which protect
the environment while encouraging economic development and accommodating
growth, and that this decision-making framework can also be utilized to make
decisions regarding shorelines.

In addition to growth
management activities, many of the cities and counties in the state are also
engaged in watershed planning and salmon recovery efforts. The legislature
recognizes that watershed planning and salmon recovery have direct links to
shoreline development and protection. The specific information developed
through these watershed planning processes and salmon recovery efforts may
constitute the best available science necessary for local elected officials to
make informed decisions regarding shorelines that take into account local
variations in the land and hydrology. The legislature believes that by
allowing some greater flexibility to local governments regarding shoreline
protection, shoreline protection can be maintained and coordination increased
between growth management and other planning efforts.

It is the intent of the
legislature to provide for more local government flexibility in protecting
shorelines, while upholding the public trust doctrine as it applies to
shorelines of the state. Nothing in this act is intended to change the
authority of the department of ecology to adopt guidelines pertaining to
shorelines of statewide significance which are mandatory for local governments.
Nothing in this act is intended to change the current process established for
obtaining permits under the shoreline management act.

The legislature also
finds that it is unnecessary for local governments to fully review all elements
of their comprehensive plans and development regulations every five years, and
that any updates to shoreline guidelines should be coordinated with growth
management act updates. The legislature further finds that it is more
practical for state agencies to stagger the review of growth management plans
and shoreline plan updates so that all of these plans are not subject to review
at the same time. It is the intent of the legislature to have a schedule
developed that allows for these periodic reviews to be staggered, and that
schedules the larger counties with the more sophisticated resources for review
before the smaller counties with less resources.

Sec. 2. RCW 90.58.030 and 1996 c
265 s 1 are each amended to read as follows:

As used in this chapter,
unless the context otherwise requires, the following definitions and concepts
apply:

(1) Administration:

(a)
"Department" means the department of ecology;

(b)
"Director" means the director of the department of ecology;

(c) "Local
government" means any county, incorporated city, or town which contains
within its boundaries any lands or waters subject to this chapter;

(d) "Person"
means an individual, partnership, corporation, association, organization,
cooperative, public or municipal corporation, or agency of the state or local
governmental unit however designated;

(e) "Hearing
board" means the shoreline hearings board established by this chapter.

(2) Geographical:

(a) "Extreme low
tide" means the lowest line on the land reached by a receding tide;

(b) "Ordinary high
water mark" on all lakes, streams, and tidal water is that mark that will
be found by examining the bed and banks and ascertaining where the presence and
action of waters are so common and usual, and so long continued in all ordinary
years, as to mark upon the soil a character distinct from that of the abutting
upland, in respect to vegetation as that condition exists on June 1, 1971, as
it may naturally change thereafter, or as it may change thereafter in
accordance with permits issued by a local government or the department:
PROVIDED, That in any area where the ordinary high water mark cannot be found,
the ordinary high water mark adjoining salt water shall be the line of mean
higher high tide and the ordinary high water mark adjoining fresh water shall
be the line of mean high water;

(c) "Shorelines of
the state" are the total of all "shorelines" and
"shorelines of statewide significance" within the state;

(d)
"Shorelines" means all of the water areas of the state, including
reservoirs, and their associated shorelands, together with the lands underlying
them; except (i) shorelines of statewide significance; (ii) shorelines on
segments of streams upstream of a point where the mean annual flow is twenty
cubic feet per second or less and the wetlands associated with such upstream
segments; and (iii) shorelines on lakes less than twenty acres in size and
wetlands associated with such small lakes;

(e) "Shorelines of
statewide significance" means the following shorelines of the state:

(i) The area between
the ordinary high water mark and the western boundary of the state from Cape
Disappointment on the south to Cape Flattery on the north, including harbors,
bays, estuaries, and inlets;

(ii) Those areas of
Puget Sound and adjacent salt waters and the Strait of Juan de Fuca between the
ordinary high water mark and the line of extreme low tide as follows:

(A) Nisqually Delta‑-from
DeWolf Bight to Tatsolo Point,

(B) Birch Bay‑-from
Point Whitehorn to Birch Point,

(C) Hood Canal‑-from
Tala Point to Foulweather Bluff,

(D) Skagit Bay and
adjacent area‑-from Brown Point to Yokeko Point, and

(E) Padilla Bay‑-from
March Point to William Point;

(iii) Those areas of
Puget Sound and the Strait of Juan de Fuca and adjacent salt waters north to
the Canadian line and lying seaward from the line of extreme low tide;

(iv) Those lakes,
whether natural, artificial, or a combination thereof, with a surface acreage
of one thousand acres or more measured at the ordinary high water mark;

(v) Those natural
rivers or segments thereof as follows:

(A) Any west of the
crest of the Cascade range downstream of a point where the mean annual flow is
measured at one thousand cubic feet per second or more,

(B) Any east of the
crest of the Cascade range downstream of a point where the annual flow is
measured at two hundred cubic feet per second or more, or those portions of
rivers east of the crest of the Cascade range downstream from the first three
hundred square miles of drainage area, whichever is longer;

(vi) Those shorelands
associated with (i), (ii), (iv), and (v) of this subsection (2)(e);

(f)
"Shorelands" or "shoreland areas" means those lands
extending landward for two hundred feet in all directions as measured on a
horizontal plane from the ordinary high water mark; floodways and contiguous
floodplain areas landward two hundred feet from such floodways; and all
wetlands and river deltas associated with the streams, lakes, and tidal waters
which are subject to the provisions of this chapter; the same to be designated
as to location by the department of ecology. Any county or city may determine
that portion of a one-hundred-year-flood plain to be included in its master
program as long as such portion includes, as a minimum, the floodway and the
adjacent land extending landward two hundred feet therefrom;

(g)
"Floodway" means those portions of the area of a river valley lying
streamward from the outer limits of a watercourse upon which flood waters are
carried during periods of flooding that occur with reasonable regularity,
although not necessarily annually, said floodway being identified, under normal
condition, by changes in surface soil conditions or changes in types or quality
of vegetative ground cover condition. The floodway shall not include those
lands that can reasonably be expected to be protected from flood waters by
flood control devices maintained by or maintained under license from the
federal government, the state, or a political subdivision of the state;

(h)
"Wetlands" means areas that are inundated or saturated by surface
water or ground water at a frequency and duration sufficient to support, and
that under normal circumstances do support, a prevalence of vegetation
typically adapted for life in saturated soil conditions. Wetlands generally
include swamps, marshes, bogs, and similar areas. Wetlands do not include
those artificial wetlands intentionally created from nonwetland sites,
including, but not limited to, irrigation and drainage ditches, grass-lined
swales, canals, detention facilities, wastewater treatment facilities, farm
ponds, and landscape amenities, or those wetlands created after July 1, 1990,
that were unintentionally created as a result of the construction of a road,
street, or highway. Wetlands may include those artificial wetlands
intentionally created from nonwetland areas to mitigate the conversion of
wetlands.

(3) Procedural terms:

(a)
"Guidelines" means those standards ((adopted)) developed
to ((implement)) assist in the implementation of the policy of
this chapter for regulation of use of the shorelines of the state prior to
adoption of master programs. Such standards shall also provide criteria to
local governments and the department in developing master programs. The
standards pertaining to shorelines of statewide significance shall be
considered mandatory for local governments, except to the extent that
variations are authorized by the department in accordance with this chapter.
The standards pertaining to shorelines shall be considered as recommendations
for local governments to incorporate into their master programs as specified in
RCW 90.58.080;

(b) "Master
program" shall mean the comprehensive use plan for a described area, and
the use regulations together with maps, diagrams, charts, or other descriptive
material and text, a statement of desired goals, and standards developed in
accordance with the policies enunciated in RCW 90.58.020. A master program
includes the critical area ordinances adopted by local governments pertaining
to shorelines, and the provisions adopted or approved by the department
pertaining to shorelines of statewide significance;

(c) "State master
program" is the cumulative total of all master programs approved or
adopted by the department of ecology, together with the master programs or
portions of master programs adopted by local governments pertaining to
shorelines;

(d)
"Development" means a use consisting of the construction or exterior
alteration of structures; dredging; drilling; dumping; filling; removal of any
sand, gravel, or minerals; bulkheading; driving of piling; placing of
obstructions; or any project of a permanent or temporary nature which
interferes with the normal public use of the surface of the waters overlying
lands subject to this chapter at any state of water level;

(e) "Substantial
development" shall mean any development of which the total cost or fair
market value exceeds two thousand five hundred dollars, or any development
which materially interferes with the normal public use of the water or
shorelines of the state; except that the following shall not be considered
substantial developments for the purpose of this chapter:

(i) Normal maintenance
or repair of existing structures or developments, including damage by accident,
fire, or elements;

(ii) Construction of
the normal protective bulkhead common to single family residences;

(iii) Emergency
construction necessary to protect property from damage by the elements;

(iv) Construction and
practices normal or necessary for farming, irrigation, and ranching activities,
including agricultural service roads and utilities on shorelands, and the
construction and maintenance of irrigation structures including but not limited
to head gates, pumping facilities, and irrigation channels. A feedlot of any
size, all processing plants, other activities of a commercial nature,
alteration of the contour of the shorelands by leveling or filling other than
that which results from normal cultivation, shall not be considered normal or
necessary farming or ranching activities. A feedlot shall be an enclosure or
facility used or capable of being used for feeding livestock hay, grain,
silage, or other livestock feed, but shall not include land for growing crops
or vegetation for livestock feeding and/or grazing, nor shall it include normal
livestock wintering operations;

(v) Construction or
modification of navigational aids such as channel markers and anchor buoys;

(vi) Construction on
shorelands by an owner, lessee, or contract purchaser of a single family
residence for his own use or for the use of his family, which residence does
not exceed a height of thirty-five feet above average grade level and which
meets all requirements of the state agency or local government having
jurisdiction thereof, other than requirements imposed pursuant to this chapter;

(vii) Construction of a
dock, including a community dock, designed for pleasure craft only, for the
private noncommercial use of the owner, lessee, or contract purchaser of single
and multiple family residences. This exception applies if either: (A) In salt
waters, the fair market value of the dock does not exceed two thousand five
hundred dollars; or (B) in fresh waters, the fair market value of the dock does
not exceed ten thousand dollars, but if subsequent construction having a fair
market value exceeding two thousand five hundred dollars occurs within five
years of completion of the prior construction, the subsequent construction
shall be considered a substantial development for the purpose of this chapter;

(viii) Operation,
maintenance, or construction of canals, waterways, drains, reservoirs, or other
facilities that now exist or are hereafter created or developed as a part of an
irrigation system for the primary purpose of making use of system waters,
including return flow and artificially stored ground water for the irrigation
of lands;

(ix) The marking of
property lines or corners on state-owned lands, when such marking does
not significantly interfere with normal public use of the surface of the water;

(x) Operation and
maintenance of any system of dikes, ditches, drains, or other facilities
existing on September 8, 1975, which were created, developed, or utilized primarily
as a part of an agricultural drainage or diking system;

(xi) Site exploration
and investigation activities that are prerequisite to preparation of an
application for development authorization under this chapter, if:

(A) The activity does
not interfere with the normal public use of the surface waters;

(B) The activity will
have no significant adverse impact on the environment including, but not
limited to, fish, wildlife, fish or wildlife habitat, water quality, and
aesthetic values;

(C) The activity does
not involve the installation of a structure, and upon completion of the
activity the vegetation and land configuration of the site are restored to
conditions existing before the activity;

(D) A private entity
seeking development authorization under this section first posts a performance
bond or provides other evidence of financial responsibility to the local
jurisdiction to ensure that the site is restored to preexisting conditions; and

(E) The activity is not
subject to the permit requirements of RCW 90.58.550;

(xii) The process of
removing or controlling an aquatic noxious weed, as defined in RCW 17.26.020,
through the use of an herbicide or other treatment methods applicable to weed
control that are recommended by a final environmental impact statement
published by the department of agriculture or the department jointly with other
state agencies under chapter 43.21C RCW.

Sec. 3. RCW 90.58.050 and 1995 c
347 s 303 are each amended to read as follows:

This chapter
establishes a cooperative program of shoreline management between local
government and the state. Local government shall have the primary
responsibility for initiating the planning required by this chapter and
administering the regulatory program consistent with the policy and provisions
of this chapter. For shorelines of statewide significance, the
department shall act primarily in a supportive and review capacity with an
emphasis on providing assistance to local government and on insuring compliance
with the policy and provisions of this chapter. For shorelines, the
department shall act primarily in a supportive capacity to local government by
developing recommendations for implementing the policy and provisions of this
chapter related to shorelines. The department may review and comment on
proposed critical area ordinances pertaining to shorelines.

Sec. 4. RCW 90.58.060 and 1995 c
347 s 304 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) The department
shall periodically review and adopt guidelines consistent with RCW 90.58.020,
containing the elements specified in RCW 90.58.100 for:

(a) Local
governments to consider in the development of master programs for
regulation of the uses of shorelines; and

(b) Development of
master programs for regulation of the uses of shorelines of statewide
significance.

(2) Before adopting or
amending guidelines under this section, the department shall provide an
opportunity for public review and comment as follows:

(a) The department
shall mail copies of the proposal to all cities, counties, and federally
recognized Indian tribes, and to any other person who has requested a copy, and
shall publish the proposed guidelines in the Washington state register.
Comments shall be submitted in writing to the department within sixty days from
the date the proposal has been published in the register.

(b) The department
shall hold at least four public hearings on the proposal in different locations
throughout the state to provide a reasonable opportunity for residents in all
parts of the state to present statements and views on the proposed guidelines.
Notice of the hearings shall be published at least once in each of the three
weeks immediately preceding the hearing in one or more newspapers of general
circulation in each county of the state. If an amendment to the guidelines
addresses an issue limited to one geographic area, the number and location of
hearings may be adjusted consistent with the intent of this subsection to assure
all parties a reasonable opportunity to comment on the proposed amendment. The
department shall accept written comments on the proposal during the sixty-day
public comment period and for seven days after the final public hearing.

(c) At the conclusion
of the public comment period, the department shall review the comments received
and modify the proposal consistent with the provisions of this chapter. The
proposal shall then be published for adoption pursuant to the provisions of
chapter 34.05 RCW.

(3) The department may
propose amendments to the guidelines not more than once each year. At least
once every five years the department shall conduct a review of the guidelines
pursuant to the procedures outlined in subsection (2) of this section.

Sec. 5. RCW 90.58.080 and 1995 c
347 s 305 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) Shorelines of
statewide significance and shorelines must both be designated as critical areas
under RCW 36.70A.172. Critical area designations for shorelines of statewide
significance and shorelines shall continue to recognize and allow the preferred
uses and current exemptions of this chapter, including those exemptions and
exceptions from the definitions contained in RCW 90.58.030. Proposed master programs,
portions of a master program, or an amendment to a master program related to
shorelines of statewide significance shall be submitted and approved in
accordance with RCW 90.58.090. Proposed master programs, portions of a master
program, or an amendment to a master program related to shorelines shall be
adopted in accordance with the requirements for adopting critical area
ordinances under chapter 36.70A RCW. The provisions of this chapter apply to
shorelines except where they are made expressly applicable only to shorelines
of statewide significance, or the context clearly dictates a different result.

(2) Local
governments shall develop or amend, within twenty-four months after the
adoption of guidelines as provided in RCW 90.58.060, a master program for
regulation of uses of ((the)) shorelines of ((the state)) statewide
significance consistent with the required elements of the guidelines
adopted by the department.

(3) Local
governments must consider guidelines recommended by the department for
shorelines within twenty-four months after their adoption as provided in RCW
90.58.060. Local governments may adopt alternative techniques than those
contained in the guidelines to protect shorelines so long as those alternatives
protect the shorelines, are consistent with the policy of RCW 90.58.020, and
are supported by best available science. The department may review and comment
on proposed master program amendments or new master programs related to
shorelines. Guidelines for shorelines become effective when the critical areas
ordinances adopted under chapter 36.70A RCW pertaining to the guidelines become
effective, and are presumed to be valid upon adoption.

Sec. 6. RCW 90.58.090 and 1997 c
429 s 50 are each amended to read as follows:

(1)(a) A master
program, segment of a master program, or an amendment to a master program,
as they relate to shorelines of statewide significance, shall become effective
when approved by the department. Within the time period provided in RCW
90.58.080, each local government shall have submitted a master program, either
totally or by segments, for all shorelines of ((the state)) statewide
significance within its jurisdiction to the department for review and
approval.

(b) A master
program, segment of a master program, or an amendment to a master program, as
they relate to shorelines, shall become effective as provided in RCW
90.58.080(3).

(2) Upon receipt of a
proposed master program or amendment pertaining to a shoreline of statewide
significance, the department shall:

(a) Provide notice to
and opportunity for written comment by all interested parties of record as a
part of the local government review process for the proposal and to all
persons, groups, and agencies that have requested in writing notice of proposed
master programs or amendments generally or for a specific area, subject matter,
or issue. The comment period shall be at least thirty days, unless the
department determines that the level of complexity or controversy involved
supports a shorter period;

(b) In the department's
discretion, conduct a public hearing during the thirty-day comment period in
the jurisdiction proposing the master program or amendment;

(c) Within fifteen days
after the close of public comment, request the local government to review the
issues identified by the public, interested parties, groups, and agencies and
provide a written response as to how the proposal addresses the identified
issues;

(d) Within thirty days
after receipt of the local government response pursuant to (c) of this
subsection, make written findings and conclusions regarding the consistency of
the proposal with the policy of RCW 90.58.020 and the applicable guidelines,
provide a response to the issues identified in (c) of this subsection, and
either approve the proposal as submitted, recommend specific changes necessary
to make the proposal approvable, or deny approval of the proposal in those
instances where no alteration of the proposal appears likely to be consistent
with the policy of RCW 90.58.020 and the applicable guidelines. The written
findings and conclusions shall be provided to the local government, all
interested persons, parties, groups, and agencies of record on the proposal;

(e) If the department
recommends changes to the proposed master program or amendment, within thirty
days after the department mails the written findings and conclusions to the
local government, the local government may:

(i) Agree to the
proposed changes. The receipt by the department of the written notice of
agreement constitutes final action by the department approving the amendment;
or

(ii) Submit an
alternative proposal. If, in the opinion of the department, the alternative is
consistent with the purpose and intent of the changes originally submitted by
the department and with this chapter it shall approve the changes and provide
written notice to all recipients of the written findings and conclusions. If
the department determines the proposal is not consistent with the purpose and
intent of the changes proposed by the department, the department may resubmit
the proposal for public and agency review pursuant to this section or reject
the proposal.

(3) ((The department
shall approve the segment of a master program relating to shorelines unless it
determines that the submitted segments are not consistent with the policy of
RCW 90.58.020 and the applicable guidelines.

(4))) The department shall approve those segments of
the master program relating to shorelines of statewide significance only after
determining the program provides the optimum implementation of the policy of
this chapter to satisfy the statewide interest. If the department does not
approve a segment of a local government master program relating to a shoreline
of statewide significance, the department may develop and by rule adopt an
alternative to the local government’s proposal.

(((5))) (4)
In the event a local government has not complied with the requirements of RCW
90.58.070 it may thereafter upon written notice to the department elect to
adopt a master program for the shorelines of the state within its
jurisdiction, in which event it shall comply with the provisions established by
this chapter for the adoption of a master program for such shorelines.

Upon approval of ((such))
the provisions in the master program pertaining to shorelines of
statewide significance by the department, and the date upon which the
provisions in the master program pertaining to shorelines become effective,
it shall supersede such master program as may have been adopted by the
department for such shorelines.

(((6))) (5)
A master program or amendment to a master program relating to shorelines of
statewide significance takes effect when and in such form as approved or
adopted by the department. Shoreline master programs that were adopted by the
department prior to July 22, 1995, in accordance with the provisions of this
section then in effect, shall be deemed approved by the department in
accordance with the provisions of this section that became effective on that
date. The department shall maintain a record of each master program, the
action taken on any proposal for adoption or amendment of the master program,
and any appeal of the ((department's action)) proposed master program
or amendment to the master program under RCW 90.58.190. The department's
approved document of record constitutes the official master program.

Sec. 7. RCW 90.58.100 and 1997 c
369 s 7 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) The master programs
provided for in this chapter((, when adopted or approved by the department))
shall constitute use regulations for the various shorelines of the state when
they become effective. In preparing the master programs, and any
amendments thereto, the department and local governments shall to the extent
feasible:

(a) Utilize a
systematic interdisciplinary approach which will insure the integrated use of
the natural and social sciences and the environmental design arts;

(b) Consult with and
obtain the comments of any federal, state, regional, or local agency having any
special expertise with respect to any environmental impact;

(c) Consider all plans,
studies, surveys, inventories, and systems of classification made or being made
by federal, state, regional, or local agencies, by private individuals, or by
organizations dealing with pertinent shorelines of the state;

(d) Conduct or support
such further research, studies, surveys, and interviews as are deemed
necessary;

(e) Utilize all
available information regarding hydrology, geography, topography, ecology,
economics, and other pertinent data;

(f) Employ, when
feasible, all appropriate, modern scientific data processing and computer
techniques to store, index, analyze, and manage the information gathered.

(2) The master programs
shall include, when appropriate, the following:

(a) An economic
development element for the location and design of industries, industrial
projects of statewide significance, transportation facilities, port facilities,
tourist facilities, commerce and other developments that are particularly
dependent on their location on or use of the shorelines of the state;

(b) A public access
element making provision for public access to publicly owned areas;

(c) A recreational
element for the preservation and enlargement of recreational opportunities,
including but not limited to parks, tidelands, beaches, and recreational areas;

(d) A circulation
element consisting of the general location and extent of existing and proposed
major thoroughfares, transportation routes, terminals, and other public
utilities and facilities, all correlated with the shoreline use element;

(e) A use element which
considers the proposed general distribution and general location and extent of
the use on shorelines and adjacent land areas for housing, business, industry,
transportation, agriculture, natural resources, recreation, education, public
buildings and grounds, and other categories of public and private uses of the
land;

(f) A conservation
element for the preservation of natural resources, including but not limited to
scenic vistas, aesthetics, and vital estuarine areas for fisheries and wildlife
protection;

(g) An historic,
cultural, scientific, and educational element for the protection and
restoration of buildings, sites, and areas having historic, cultural,
scientific, or educational values;

(h) An element that
gives consideration to the statewide interest in the prevention and
minimization of flood damages; and

(i) Any other element
deemed appropriate or necessary to effectuate the policy of this chapter.

(3) The master programs
shall include such map or maps, descriptive text, diagrams and charts, or other
descriptive material as are necessary to provide for ease of understanding.

(4) Master programs
will reflect that state-owned shorelines of the state are particularly adapted
to providing wilderness beaches, ecological study areas, and other recreational
activities for the public and will give appropriate special consideration to
same.

(5) Each master program
shall contain provisions to allow for the varying of the application of use
regulations of the program, including provisions for permits for conditional
uses and variances, to insure that strict implementation of a program will not create
unnecessary hardships or thwart the policy enumerated in RCW 90.58.020. Any
such varying shall be allowed only if extraordinary circumstances are shown and
the public interest suffers no substantial detrimental effect. The concept of
this subsection shall be incorporated in the rules adopted by the department
relating to the establishment of a permit system as provided in RCW
90.58.140(3).

(6) Each master program
shall contain standards governing the protection of single family residences
and appurtenant structures against damage or loss due to shoreline erosion.
The standards shall govern the issuance of substantial development permits for
shoreline protection, including structural methods such as construction of
bulkheads, and nonstructural methods of protection. The standards shall
provide for methods which achieve effective and timely protection against loss
or damage to single family residences and appurtenant structures due to
shoreline erosion. The standards shall provide a preference for permit
issuance for measures to protect single family residences occupied prior to
January 1, 1992, where the proposed measure is designed to minimize harm to the
shoreline natural environment.

Sec. 8. RCW 90.58.190 and 1995 c
347 s 311 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) The appeal of the
department’s decision to adopt a master program or amendment pursuant to RCW
90.58.070(2) or 90.58.090(((4))) (3) is governed by RCW 34.05.510
through 34.05.598.

(2)(a) The department's
decision to approve, reject, or modify a proposed master program or amendment pertaining
to shorelines of statewide significance adopted by a local government
planning under RCW 36.70A.040; or the adoption of a critical areas ordinance
pertaining to shorelines by a local government planning under RCW 36.70A.040;
shall be appealed to the growth management hearings board with jurisdiction
over the local government. The appeal shall be initiated by filing a petition
as provided in RCW 36.70A.250 through 36.70A.320.

(b) If the appeal to
the growth management hearings board concerns shorelines, the growth management
hearings board shall review the proposed master program or amendment for
compliance with the requirements of this chapter and chapter 36.70A RCW, the
policy of RCW 90.58.020 and the applicable guidelines, and chapter 43.21C RCW
as it relates to the adoption of master programs and amendments under chapter
90.58 RCW.

(c) If the appeal to
the growth management hearings board concerns a shoreline of statewide
significance, the board shall uphold the decision by the department unless the
board, by clear and convincing evidence, determines that the decision of the
department is inconsistent with the requirements of this chapter or chapter
36.70A RCW, the policy of RCW 90.58.020 and the applicable guidelines,
or chapter 43.21C RCW as it relates to the adoption of master programs and
amendments under this chapter.

(d) The appellant has
the burden of proof in all appeals to the growth management hearings board
under this subsection.

(e) Any party aggrieved
by a final decision of a growth management hearings board under this subsection
may appeal the decision to superior court as provided in RCW 36.70A.300.

(3)(a) The department's
decision to approve, reject, or modify a proposed master program or master
program amendment pertaining to shorelines of statewide significance by
a local government not planning under RCW 36.70A.040 shall be appealed to the
shorelines hearings board by filing a petition within thirty days of the date
of the department’s written notice to the local government of the department’s
decision to approve, reject, or modify a proposed master program or master
program amendment as provided in RCW 90.58.090(2).

(b) The adoption of
a critical areas ordinance pertaining to shorelines by a local government not
planning under RCW 36.70A.040 shall be appealed to the shorelines hearings
board by filing a petition within sixty days after its publication by the
legislative bodies of the county, city, or town as provided in RCW
36.70A.290(2).

(c) In an appeal
relating to shorelines, the shorelines hearings board shall review the proposed
master program or master program amendment ((and, after full consideration
of the presentations of the local government and the department, shall
determine the validity of the local government's master program or amendment in
light of)) for compliance with the requirements of this chapter, the
policy of RCW 90.58.020 and the applicable guidelines, and chapter 43.21C
RCW as it relates to the adoption of master programs and amendments under this
chapter.

(((c))) (d)
In an appeal relating to shorelines of statewide significance, the shorelines
hearings board shall uphold the decision by the department unless the board
determines, by clear and convincing evidence that the decision of the
department is inconsistent with the requirements of this chapter, the
policy of RCW 90.58.020 and the applicable guidelines, or chapter 43.21C RCW
as it relates to the adoption of master programs and amendments under this
chapter.

(((d))) (e)
Review by the shorelines hearings board shall be considered an adjudicative
proceeding under chapter 34.05 RCW, the Administrative Procedure Act. The ((aggrieved
local government)) appellant shall have the burden of proof in all
such reviews. The board shall fully consider the presentations of the local
government and the department in making its determinations.

(((e))) (f)
Whenever possible, the review by the shorelines hearings board shall be heard
within the county where the land subject to the proposed master program or
master program amendment is primarily located. ((The department and any
local government)) Any party aggrieved by a final decision of the
hearings board may appeal the decision to superior court as provided in chapter
34.05 RCW.

(4) A master program
amendment pertaining to shorelines of statewide significance shall
become effective after the approval of the department or after the decision of
the shorelines hearings board to uphold the master program or master program
amendment, provided that the board may remand the master program or master
program adjustment to the local government or the department for modification
prior to the final adoption of the master program or master program amendment.

Sec. 9. RCW 36.70A.030 and 1997
c 429 s 3 are each amended to read as follows:

Unless the context
clearly requires otherwise, the definitions in this section apply throughout this
chapter.

(1) "Adopt a
comprehensive land use plan" means to enact a new comprehensive land use
plan or to update an existing comprehensive land use plan.

(2) "Agricultural
land" means land primarily devoted to the commercial production of
horticultural, viticultural, floricultural, dairy, apiary, vegetable, or animal
products or of berries, grain, hay, straw, turf, seed, Christmas trees not
subject to the excise tax imposed by RCW 84.33.100 through 84.33.140, finfish
in upland hatcheries, or livestock, and that has long-term commercial
significance for agricultural production.

(3) "City"
means any city or town, including a code city.

(4) "Comprehensive
land use plan," "comprehensive plan," or "plan" means
a generalized coordinated land use policy statement of the governing body of a
county or city that is adopted pursuant to this chapter.

(5) "Critical
areas" include the following areas and ecosystems: (a) Wetlands; (b)
areas with a critical recharging effect on aquifers used for potable water; (c)
fish and wildlife habitat conservation areas; (d) frequently flooded areas; ((and))
(e) geologically hazardous areas; and (f) shorelines of the state as defined
in RCW 90.58.030.

(6)
"Department" means the department of community, trade, and economic
development.

(7) "Development
regulations" or "regulation" means the controls placed on
development or land use activities by a county or city, including, but not
limited to, zoning ordinances, critical areas ordinances, shoreline master
programs, official controls, planned unit development ordinances, subdivision
ordinances, and binding site plan ordinances together with any amendments
thereto. A development regulation does not include a decision to approve a
project permit application, as defined in RCW 36.70B.020, even though the
decision may be expressed in a resolution or ordinance of the legislative body
of the county or city.

(8) "Forest
land" means land primarily devoted to growing trees for long-term
commercial timber production on land that can be economically and practically
managed for such production, including Christmas trees subject to the excise
tax imposed under RCW 84.33.100 through 84.33.140, and that has long-term commercial
significance. In determining whether forest land is primarily devoted to
growing trees for long-term commercial timber production on land that can be
economically and practically managed for such production, the following factors
shall be considered: (a) The proximity of the land to urban, suburban, and
rural settlements; (b) surrounding parcel size and the compatibility and
intensity of adjacent and nearby land uses; (c) long-term local economic
conditions that affect the ability to manage for timber production; and (d) the
availability of public facilities and services conducive to conversion of
forest land to other uses.

(9) "Geologically
hazardous areas" means areas that because of their susceptibility to
erosion, sliding, earthquake, or other geological events, are not suited to the
siting of commercial, residential, or industrial development consistent with
public health or safety concerns.

(10) "Long-term
commercial significance" includes the growing capacity, productivity, and
soil composition of the land for long-term commercial production, in
consideration with the land's proximity to population areas, and the
possibility of more intense uses of the land.

(11)
"Minerals" include gravel, sand, and valuable metallic substances.

(12) "Natural
resource lands" means agricultural land, forest land, and mineral resource
land.

(13)
"Public facilities" include streets, roads, highways, sidewalks,
street and road lighting systems, traffic signals, domestic water systems,
storm and sanitary sewer systems, parks and recreational facilities, and
schools.

(((13))) (14)
"Public services" include fire protection and suppression, law
enforcement, public health, education, recreation, environmental protection,
and other governmental services.

(((14))) (15)
"Rural character" refers to the patterns of land use and development
established by a county in the rural element of its comprehensive plan:

(a) In which open
space, the natural landscape, and vegetation predominate over the built
environment;

(b) That foster
traditional rural lifestyles, rural-based economies, and opportunities to both
live and work in rural areas;

(c) That provide visual
landscapes that are traditionally found in rural areas and communities;

(d) That are compatible
with the use of the land by wildlife and for fish and wildlife habitat;

(e) That reduce the
inappropriate conversion of undeveloped land into sprawling, low‑density
development;

(f) That generally do
not require the extension of urban governmental services; and

(g) That are consistent
with the protection of natural surface water flows and ground water and surface
water recharge and discharge areas.

(((15))) (16)
"Rural development" refers to development outside the urban growth
area and outside agricultural, forest, and mineral resource lands designated
pursuant to RCW 36.70A.170. Rural development can consist of a variety of uses
and residential densities, including clustered residential development, at
levels that are consistent with the preservation of rural character and the
requirements of the rural element. Rural development does not refer to
agriculture or forestry activities that may be conducted in rural areas.

(((16))) (17)
"Rural governmental services" or "rural services" include
those public services and public facilities historically and typically
delivered at an intensity usually found in rural areas, and may include
domestic water systems, fire and police protection services, transportation and
public transit services, and other public utilities associated with rural
development and normally not associated with urban areas. Rural services do
not include storm or sanitary sewers, except as otherwise authorized by RCW
36.70A.110(4).

(((17))) (18)
"Urban growth" refers to growth that makes intensive use of land for
the location of buildings, structures, and impermeable surfaces to such a
degree as to be incompatible with the primary use of land for the production of
food, other agricultural products, or fiber, or the extraction of mineral
resources, rural uses, rural development, and natural resource lands designated
pursuant to RCW 36.70A.170. A pattern of more intensive rural development, as
provided in RCW 36.70A.070(5)(d), is not urban growth. When allowed to spread
over wide areas, urban growth typically requires urban governmental services.
"Characterized by urban growth" refers to land having urban growth
located on it, or to land located in relationship to an area with urban growth
on it as to be appropriate for urban growth.

(((18))) (19)
"Urban growth areas" means those areas designated by a county
pursuant to RCW 36.70A.110.

(((19))) (20)
"Urban governmental services" or "urban services" include
those public services and public facilities at an intensity historically and
typically provided in cities, specifically including storm and sanitary sewer
systems, domestic water systems, street cleaning services, fire and police
protection services, public transit services, and other public utilities
associated with urban areas and normally not associated with rural areas.

(((20))) (21)
"Wetland" or "wetlands" means areas that are inundated or
saturated by surface water or ground water at a frequency and duration
sufficient to support, and that under normal circumstances do support, a
prevalence of vegetation typically adapted for life in saturated soil
conditions. Wetlands generally include swamps, marshes, bogs, and similar
areas. Wetlands do not include those artificial wetlands intentionally created
from nonwetland sites, including, but not limited to, irrigation and drainage
ditches, grass-lined swales, canals, detention facilities, wastewater treatment
facilities, farm ponds, and landscape amenities, or those wetlands created
after July 1, 1990, that were unintentionally created as a result of the
construction of a road, street, or highway. Wetlands may include those
artificial wetlands intentionally created from nonwetland areas created to
mitigate conversion of wetlands.

Sec. 10. RCW 36.70A.060 and 1998
c 286 s 5 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) Each county ((that
is required or chooses to plan)) planning under RCW 36.70A.040, and
each city within such county, shall adopt development regulations on or before
September 1, 1991, to assure the conservation of agricultural, forest, and
mineral resource lands designated under RCW 36.70A.170. Regulations adopted
under this subsection may not prohibit uses legally existing on any parcel
prior to their adoption and shall remain in effect until the county or city
adopts development regulations pursuant to RCW 36.70A.040. Such regulations
shall assure that the use of lands adjacent to agricultural, forest, or mineral
resource lands shall not interfere with the continued use, in the accustomed
manner and in accordance with best management practices, of these designated
lands for the production of food, agricultural products, or timber, or for the
extraction of minerals. Counties and cities shall require that all plats,
short plats, development permits, and building permits issued for development
activities on, or within five hundred feet of, lands designated as agricultural
lands, forest lands, or mineral resource lands, contain a notice that the
subject property is within or near designated agricultural lands, forest lands,
or mineral resource lands on which a variety of commercial activities may occur
that are not compatible with residential development for certain periods of
limited duration. The notice for mineral resource lands shall also inform that
an application might be made for mining-related activities, including mining,
extraction, washing, crushing, stockpiling, blasting, transporting, and
recycling of minerals.

(2) Each county and
city shall adopt development regulations that protect critical areas that are
required to be designated under RCW 36.70A.170, including shorelines of the
state as defined in RCW 90.58.030. Development regulations for shorelines of
statewide significance and shorelines shall continue to recognize and allow the
preferred uses and current exemptions of chapter 90.58 RCW, including those
exemptions and exceptions from the definitions contained in RCW 90.58.030.
For counties and cities that are required or choose to plan under RCW
36.70A.040, such development regulations shall be adopted on or before
September 1, 1991. For the remainder of the counties and cities, such development
regulations shall be adopted on or before March 1, 1992. Counties and
cities that contain shorelines of the state within their jurisdictions that
were not previously designated as critical areas must adopt interim development
regulations for the protection of these shorelines within one year after the
effective date of this act, following an opportunity for public review and
comment. The interim development regulations, and any existing critical areas
ordinances pertaining to shorelines of the state, must include penalties for
any violations which may occur. In developing these interim development
regulations, counties and cities must also consider strategies to protect any
commercial shellfish beds located near the shoreline. Interim development
regulations adopted under this section to protect shorelines may remain in
effect until a formal review is conducted under RCW 36.70A.130.

(3) ((Such counties
and cities)) Each county and city planning under RCW 36.70A.040
shall review these designations and development regulations when adopting ((their))
its comprehensive ((plans)) plan under RCW 36.70A.040 and
implementing development regulations under RCW 36.70A.120, or reviewing its
comprehensive plan and development regulations under RCW 36.70A.130, and
may alter ((such)) these designations and development regulations
to insure consistency.

(((4) Forest land
and agricultural land located within urban growth areas shall not be designated
by a county or city as forest land or agricultural land of long-term commercial
significance under RCW 36.70A.170 unless the city or county has enacted a
program authorizing transfer or purchase of development rights.))

Sec. 11. RCW 36.70A.106 and 1991
sp.s. c 32 s 8 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) Each county and
city proposing adoption of a comprehensive plan or development regulations
under this chapter shall notify the department of its intent to adopt such plan
or regulations at least sixty days prior to final adoption. Each county and
city proposing the adoption of critical areas ordinances for the protection of
shorelines must notify the department of ecology of its intent to adopt the
ordinances, and submit a copy of the proposed ordinances to the department of
ecology for the department's review and comment at least sixty days prior to
the final adoption of the ordinances. State agencies including the
department may provide comments to the county or city on the proposed
comprehensive plan, or proposed development regulations, during the public
review process prior to adoption.

(2) Each county and
city planning under this chapter shall transmit a complete and accurate copy of
its comprehensive plan or development regulations to the department within ten
days after final adoption.

(3) Any amendments for
permanent changes to a comprehensive plan or development regulation that are
proposed by a county or city to its adopted plan or regulations shall be
submitted to the department in the same manner as initial plans and development
regulations under this section. Any amendments to a comprehensive plan or
development regulations that are adopted by a county or city shall be
transmitted to the department in the same manner as the initial plans and
regulations under this section.

Sec. 12. RCW 36.70A.130 and 1997
c 429 s 10 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) Each comprehensive
land use plan and development regulations shall be subject to continuing review
and evaluation by the county or city that adopted them. ((Not later than
September 1, 2002, and at least every five years thereafter, a county or city
shall take action to))

The department shall
establish a schedule for each county, and each city located within that county,
to complete periodic formal reviews and, if needed, ((revise))
revisions of its comprehensive land use plan and development regulations
to ensure that those provisions in the plan and regulations are
complying with ((the)) all applicable requirements of this
chapter. The schedule shall require a periodic formal review approximately
once every five years for provisions pertaining to critical areas and natural
resource lands, and a periodic formal review approximately once every ten years
for the remainder of the comprehensive land use plan and development
regulations. For provisions pertaining to critical areas and natural resource
lands, the initial periodic review is required approximately five years after
the county initially adopted its comprehensive plan, or adopted amendments to
its initial comprehensive plan in response to an order of noncompliance by a
growth management hearings board that the board finds to be in compliance with
the requirements of this chapter. For the remainder of the comprehensive plan
and development regulations, the initial periodic review is required
approximately ten years after the county initially adopted its comprehensive
plan, or adopted amendments to its initial comprehensive plan in response to an
order of noncompliance by a growth management hearings board that the board
finds to be in compliance with the requirements of this chapter. A review
and evaluation required by this subsection may be combined with the review
required by subsection (3) of this section.

Any amendment or
revision to a comprehensive land use plan shall conform to this chapter, and
any change to development regulations shall be consistent with and implement
the comprehensive plan.

(2)(a) Each county and
city shall establish and broadly disseminate to the public a public
participation program identifying procedures whereby proposed amendments or
revisions of the comprehensive plan are considered by the governing body of the
county or city no more frequently than once every year except that amendments
may be considered more frequently under the following circumstances:

(i) The initial
adoption of a subarea plan;

(ii) The adoption or
amendment of a shoreline master program under the procedures set forth in
chapter 90.58 RCW; and

(iii) The amendment of
the capital facilities element of a comprehensive plan that occurs concurrently
with the adoption or amendment of a county or city budget.

(b) Except as otherwise
provided in (a) of this subsection, all proposals shall be considered by the
governing body concurrently so the cumulative effect of the various proposals
can be ascertained. However, after appropriate public participation a county
or city may adopt amendments or revisions to its comprehensive plan that
conform with this chapter whenever an emergency exists or to resolve an appeal
of a comprehensive plan filed with a growth management hearings board or with
the court.

(3) The department
shall establish a schedule for each county that designates urban growth
areas under RCW 36.70A.110 ((shall review, at least every ten years)), and
the cities within those counties, to complete a formal review of its
designated urban growth area or areas, and the densities permitted within both
the incorporated and unincorporated portions of each urban growth area. The
schedule shall require this review approximately once every ten years after the
county initially established its final urban growth areas or last formally
reviewed its urban growth areas under this subsection. In conjunction with
this review by the county, each city located within an urban growth area shall
review the densities permitted within its boundaries, and the extent to which
the urban growth occurring within the county has located within each city and
the unincorporated portions of the urban growth areas. The county
comprehensive plan designating urban growth areas, and the densities permitted
in the urban growth areas by the comprehensive plans of the county and each
city located within the urban growth areas, shall be revised to accommodate the
urban growth projected to occur in the county for the succeeding twenty-year
period. The review required by this subsection may be combined with the review
and evaluation required by RCW 36.70A.215.

(4) In developing a
schedule for formal review under subsections (1) and (3) of this section, the
department shall consider the population size of each county, the date when the
comprehensive plans and development regulations were adopted or last revised by
each county and the cities within such county, the growth rate of each county,
and the resources available to each county and the cities within such county to
conduct a formal review pursuant to this section.

Sec. 13. RCW 36.70A.170 and 1990
1st ex.s. c 17 s 17 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) On or before
September 1, 1991, each county, and each city, shall designate where
appropriate:

(a) Agricultural lands
that are not already characterized by urban growth and that have long-term
significance for the commercial production of food or other agricultural
products, but agricultural land located within an urban growth area shall
not be designated as agricultural land of long-term commercial significance
unless the county or city has enacted a program authorizing transfer or
purchase of development rights from such lands;

(b) Forest lands that
are not already characterized by urban growth and that have long-term
significance for the commercial production of timber, but forest land
located within an urban growth area shall not be designated as forest land of
long-term commercial significance by a county or city unless the county or city
has enacted a program authorizing transfer or purchase of development rights from
such lands;

(c) Mineral resource
lands that are not already characterized by urban growth and that have
long-term significance for the extraction of minerals; and

(d) Critical areas.

(2) In making the
designations required by this section, counties and cities shall consider the
guidelines established pursuant to RCW 36.70A.050.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
14. A new section is added
to chapter 36.70A RCW to read as follows:

In addition to the
process provided in RCW 36.70A.215 for amending countywide planning policies, a
county may revise its countywide planning policies according to the procedures
provided in RCW 36.70A.210 for the initial establishment of countywide planning
policies. The countywide planning policies may be amended following a review
conducted under RCW 36.70A.130, and may also include policies implementing
watershed planning under chapter 90.82 RCW, and policies developed in response
to listings of species under the federal endangered species act (16 U.S.C. Sec.
1531 et seq.). The purpose of this section is to encourage further integration
of different local planning efforts, and nothing in this section creates a
cause of action against a county or a city for amending or failing to amend any
development regulations or portion of the comprehensive plan following an
amendment of the countywide planning policies under this section.

Sec. 15. RCW 36.70A.290 and 1997
c 429 s 12 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) All requests for
review to a growth management hearings board shall be initiated by filing a
petition that includes a detailed statement of issues presented for resolution
by the board. The board shall render written decisions articulating the basis
for its holdings. The board shall not issue advisory opinions on issues not
presented to the board in the statement of issues, as modified by any
prehearing order.

(2) All petitions
relating to whether or not an adopted comprehensive plan, development
regulation, or permanent amendment thereto, is in compliance with the goals and
requirements of this chapter or chapter 90.58 or 43.21C RCW must be filed
within sixty days after publication by the legislative bodies of the county or
city.

(a) Except as provided
in (c) of this subsection, the date of publication for a city shall be the date
the city publishes the ordinance, or summary of the ordinance, adopting the
comprehensive plan or development regulations, or amendment thereto, as is
required to be published.

(b) Promptly after adoption,
a county shall publish a notice that it has adopted the comprehensive plan or
development regulations, or amendment thereto.

Except as provided in
(c) of this subsection, for purposes of this section the date of publication
for a county shall be the date the county publishes the notice that it has
adopted the comprehensive plan or development regulations, or amendment
thereto.

(c) For local
governments planning under RCW 36.70A.040, promptly after approval or
disapproval of a local government’s shoreline master program or amendment
thereto by the department of ecology as provided in RCW 90.58.090 with
regard to a shoreline of statewide significance, the local government shall
publish a notice that the shoreline master program or amendment thereto has
been approved or disapproved by the department of ecology. For purposes of
this section, the date of publication for the adoption or amendment of a
shoreline master program is the date the local government publishes notice that
the shoreline master program or amendment thereto has been approved or
disapproved by the department of ecology.

(3) Unless the board
dismisses the petition as frivolous or finds that the person filing the
petition lacks standing, or the parties have filed an agreement to have the
case heard in superior court as provided in RCW 36.70A.295, the board shall,
within ten days of receipt of the petition, set a time for hearing the matter.

(4) The board shall
base its decision on the record developed by the city, county, or the state and
supplemented with additional evidence if the board determines that such
additional evidence would be necessary or of substantial assistance to the
board in reaching its decision.

(5) The board, shall
consolidate, when appropriate, all petitions involving the review of the same
comprehensive plan or the same development regulation or regulations.

Sec. 16. RCW 36.70A.480 and 1995
c 347 s 104 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) For shorelines of
the state, the goals and policies of the shoreline management act as set forth
in RCW 90.58.020 are added as one of the goals of this chapter as set forth in
RCW 36.70A.020. The goals and policies of a shoreline master program for a
county or city approved under chapter 90.58 RCW shall be considered an element
of the county or city's comprehensive plan. All other portions of the
shoreline master program for a county or city adopted under chapter 90.58 RCW,
including use regulations, shall be considered a part of the county or city's
development regulations. Shorelines of the state must be designated and
protected as critical areas as provided in this chapter.

(2) The shoreline
master program shall be adopted pursuant to the procedures of chapter 90.58 RCW
rather than the procedures set forth in this chapter for the adoption of a
comprehensive plan or development regulations, except that critical areas
ordinances for shorelines, as defined in RCW 90.58.030, shall be adopted in
accordance with the provisions of this chapter.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 17. If any provision of this
act or its application to any person or circumstance is held invalid, the
remainder of the act or the application of the provision to other persons or
circumstances is not affected.

---
END ---