BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF
WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec.
1. The legislature finds
that Washington's educators have made significant progress in preparing
students for successful and productive lives in the twenty-first century.

The legislature further
finds the need for an effective accountability system to help fulfill the
promise of statewide school improvement efforts for all Washington students.
The legislature recognizes that all stakeholders in Washington's public
education system share in the responsibility for an effective accountability
system, including educators, students, parents, the community, and state
policymakers. An effective accountability system should inform, support, and
motivate, as well as require achievement of the state's learning goals.

The legislature further
finds that the goals of this accountability system are to promote learning and
achievement of the goals and academic standards for all students as measured by
the elementary, middle, and high school assessments; to acknowledge the
challenges faced by students and teachers in achieving these goals; and to
develop the necessary supports to address these challenges.

The legislature further
finds that the changes needed to fulfill the challenging goals of our school
improvement efforts cannot be accomplished solely by individual educators.
Therefore, a comprehensive system of assistance must be developed and made
available to all schools. Components must include continuous research for
informed decision making, staff and administrative professional development,
and curriculum and instruction resources.

The legislature further
finds that an effective accountability system also must provide incentives to
local schools to make needed improvements, particularly those focused on
helping students succeed despite poverty, lack of English proficiency,
mobility, disabilities, and family difficulties. Further, the system must
encourage educators to work in schools facing these challenges. Districts and
schools must be measured for continuous improvement over time against their own
baseline, not against the performance of other schools.

The legislature further
finds that the accountability system should rely on local responsibility and
leadership. The system should respect and support local flexibility in the
design, financing, and management of schools, including their instructional
programs, organization, and structure. State-level responsibility should
emphasize assistance, technical support, and monitoring. At the same time, the
legislature finds that state intervention may be necessary in schools that
persistently fail to show adequate achievement or improvement over time. In
such cases, the state must have the capacity to intervene effectively on behalf
of students. The process for assistance and intervention must consist of
distinct phases including: Voluntary focused assistance; nonvoluntary focused
assistance; and more intensive state sanctions for persistently low-performing
schools.

Sec. 2. RCW 28A.655.030 and 1999
c 388 s 102 are each amended to read as follows:

The powers and duties
of the academic achievement and accountability commission shall include, but
are not limited to the following:

(1) For purposes of
statewide accountability, the commission shall:

(a) Adopt and revise:

(i) Performance
improvement goals in reading, writing, science, and mathematics by subject and
grade level as the commission deems appropriate to improve student learning,
once assessments in these subjects are required statewide. The goals shall be
in addition to any goals adopted in RCW 28A.655.050. The commission may also
revise any goal adopted in RCW 28A.655.050;

(ii) Goals for
dropout rates and reduction of dropout rates for middle schools, junior high
schools, and high schools, once common definitions and a student tracking
system are developed;

(iii) Goals designed
to accelerate the achievement of students from various demographic and
socioeconomic backgrounds who are disproportionately academically underachieving.

The commission shall
adopt the goals by rule. However, before each goal is implemented, the
commission shall present the goal to the education committees of the house of
representatives and the senate for the committees' review and comment in a time
frame that will permit the legislature to take statutory action on the goal if
such action is deemed warranted by the legislature;

(b) Identify the scores
students must achieve in order to meet the standard on the Washington
assessment of student learning and determine student scores that identify
levels of student performance below and beyond the standard. The commission
shall set such performance standards and levels in consultation with the
superintendent of public instruction and after consideration of any
recommendations that may be developed by any advisory committees that may be
established for this purpose;

(c) Adopt objective,
systematic criteria to identify successful schools and school districts and
recommend to the superintendent of public instruction schools and districts to
be recognized for two types of accomplishments, student achievement and
improvements in student achievement. Recognition for improvements in student
achievement shall include consideration of one or more of the following
accomplishments:

(i) An increase in the
percent of students meeting standards. The level of achievement required for
recognition may be based on the achievement goals established by the
legislature under RCW 28A.655.050 and the commission under (a) of this
subsection;

(ii) Positive progress
on an improvement index that measures improvement in all levels of the
assessment; and

(iii) Improvements
despite challenges such as high levels of mobility, poverty, English as a
second language learners, and large numbers of students in special populations
as measured by either the percent of students meeting the standard, or the
improvement index.

When determining the
baseline year or years for recognizing individual schools, the commission may
use the assessment results from the initial years the assessments were
administered, if doing so with individual schools would be appropriate;

(d) Adopt objective,
systematic criteria to identify schools and school districts in need of
assistance and those in which significant numbers of students persistently fail
to meet state standards, including schools that may be invited or directed
to accept focused assistance. In its deliberations, the commission shall
consider the use of all statewide mandated criterion-referenced and
norm-referenced standardized tests;

(e) Identify schools
and school districts in which state ((intervention measures)) sanctions
will be needed and a range of appropriate ((intervention strategies)) sanctions,
beginning no earlier than June 30, ((2001, and after the legislature has
authorized a set of intervention strategies)) 2004. Beginning no
earlier than June 30, ((2001, and after the legislature has authorized a set
of intervention strategies)) 2004, at the request of the commission,
the superintendent shall intervene in the school or school district and ((take
corrective actions. This chapter does not provide additional authority for the
commission or the superintendent of public instruction to intervene in a school
or school district)) implement state sanctions authorized by the
legislature;

(f) Identify
performance incentive systems that have improved or have the potential to
improve student achievement;

(g) Annually review the
assessment reporting system to ensure fairness, accuracy, timeliness, and
equity of opportunity, especially with regard to schools with special
circumstances and unique populations of students, and ((a recommendation))
recommend to the superintendent of public instruction ((of)) any
improvements needed to the system;

(h) Annually report by
December 1st to the legislature, the governor, the superintendent of public
instruction, and the state board of education on the progress, findings, and
recommendations of the commission. The report may include recommendations of
actions to help improve student achievement;

(i) By December 1,
2000, and by December 1st annually thereafter, report to the education
committees of the house of representatives and the senate on the progress that
has been made in achieving the reading goal under RCW 28A.655.050 and any
additional goals adopted by the commission;

(j) Coordinate its
activities with the state board of education and the office of the
superintendent of public instruction;

(k) Seek advice from
the public and all interested educational organizations in the conduct of its
work; ((and))

(l) Establish advisory
committees, which may include persons who are not members of the commission; and

(m) Develop and
analyze any data or information necessary to perform its accountability
responsibilities;

(2) Holding meetings
and public hearings, which may include regional meetings and hearings;

(3) Hiring necessary
staff and determining the staff's duties and compensation. However, the office
of the superintendent of public instruction shall provide staff support to the
commission until the commission has hired its own staff, and shall provide most
of the technical assistance and logistical support needed by the commission
thereafter. The office of the superintendent of public instruction shall be
the fiscal agent for the commission. The commission may direct the office of
the superintendent of public instruction to enter into subcontracts, within the
commission's resources, with school districts, teachers, higher education
faculty, state agencies, business organizations, and other individuals and
organizations to assist the commission in its deliberations; and

(4) Receiving per diem
and travel allowances as permitted under RCW 43.03.050 and 43.03.060.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
3. A new section is added
to chapter 28A.655 RCW to read as follows:

(1) The superintendent
of public instruction, based on the criteria established by the academic
achievement and accountability commission, shall annually analyze assessment
results. The analysis shall include, but need not be limited to, consideration
of the levels of achievement and levels of improvement on criterion-referenced
and norm-referenced assessments required to meet goals and achievement levels
determined by the academic achievement and accountability commission. The
purposes of the analysis shall be:

(a) To identify
successful schools and school districts, based on criteria adopted by the
commission;

(b) To identify schools
in need of focused assistance, based on criteria adopted by the commission; and

(c) After June 15,
2004, to help the commission identify schools and school districts in which
more intensive state sanctions may be needed.

(2) Based on the
results of the analysis in subsection (1)(b) of this section, the commission
shall determine which schools shall be prioritized as having the highest need
for focused assistance. Subject to available appropriations and the
determination made under this subsection, the commission shall determine the
number of schools eligible for focused assistance annually by September 15th.

(3) The superintendent
of public instruction shall provide the commission with available data,
including raw student data, and other information the commission deems
appropriate in pursuit of the fulfillment of its responsibility to provide
oversight and monitoring of the state's educational accountability system.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
4. A new section is added
to chapter 28A.655 RCW to read as follows:

(1) If a school is
eligible for focused assistance, each year by October 1st, the superintendent
of public instruction shall notify the school district within which the school
is located of such eligibility. A school district with an eligible school may
request focused assistance under this section by notifying the superintendent
of public instruction by November 1st.

(2) Once a school
district has notified the superintendent of public instruction that the
district will accept focused assistance on behalf of an eligible school, the
superintendent of public instruction, in cooperation with the school district
in which the school is located, shall oversee the following process:

(a) The superintendent
of public instruction or the superintendent's designee, in cooperation with the
district and with the assistance of educational experts, shall convene a team
to conduct an academic audit of, and a needs assessment for, the school. The team
shall present its findings and recommendations to the superintendent of public
instruction and the school directors of the district. The superintendent of
public instruction shall share those results with the academic achievement and
accountability commission.

(b) The school
directors shall hold a public hearing to inform parents, teachers, staff, and
the local community about the findings and recommendation of the academic audit
and the needs assessment. The school directors shall solicit advice on how to
address the issues identified by the academic audit and needs assessment.

(c) Based on the
results of the academic audit, needs assessment, and community response, the
district, with the assistance of the superintendent of public instruction or
the superintendent's designee, shall develop a comprehensive school improvement
plan;

(d) Based on the
results of the school improvement plan and the requirements of section 5 of
this act, the superintendent of public instruction or the superintendent's
designee and the school district shall adopt a performance agreement.

(3) The superintendent
of public instruction and the academic achievement and accountability
commission shall monitor district progress in the implementation of the
performance agreement.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
5. A new section is added
to chapter 28A.655 RCW to read as follows:

(1) Focused assistance,
as outlined in this chapter, shall be available to a school district on behalf
of an eligible school to complete an academic audit and needs assessment,
develop a comprehensive school improvement plan, and implement a performance
agreement. Focused assistance for performance agreement implementation may not
be provided to a school district in a given academic year unless the agreement
is approved within one hundred eighty calendar days of the date the district
accepts the offer of focused assistance. Assistance may be obtained from third
parties, such as personnel from colleges or universities, independent contractors,
statewide education organizations, and educational service districts.

(2) The academic audit
shall include an assessment of the things that are working well in the school
and those which need reexamination and refinement. The audit may also include,
but need not be limited to, an assessment of the types of philosophy, vision,
skills, strategies, resources, organization, evaluation, monitoring, and
rewards and sanctions that need attention in the school.

(3) The needs
assessment shall analyze multiple indicators including but not limited to:

(a) Student achievement
from school, district, and statewide assessments;

(b) Improvement in
student achievement over time;

(c) Current allocation
and use of existing resources;

(d) Student mobility
and poverty indicators;

(e) Attendance rates;

(f) Dropout and
graduation rates, if applicable and available;

(g) Posthigh school
indicators, if applicable and available;

(h) Percent of students
in special programs;

(i) School climate and
safety indicators; and

(j) Other barriers to
improvement.

(4) Based on results of
the academic audit, the needs assessment, and community input, a school
improvement plan shall be developed or revised by the district, with the
assistance of the superintendent of public instruction or the superintendent's
designee. The plan, which shall be developed with the involvement of the
school's staff, parents, and major employee organizations, shall address
identified barriers to improved student performance.

(5) Third parties may provide
assistance in the development of the improvement plan. The improvement plan
shall include, but need not be limited to a description of:

(a) Student performance
goals and expectations;

(b) How existing funds
will be used more effectively;

(c) The most
significant barriers to improvement and how those barriers will be addressed;

(d) What actions are
needed to assist the school;

(e) Who is responsible
for implementing the specific actions in the plan;

(f) Whether students
attending the school should have the choice of transferring to other public
schools in the district, and whether this choice includes free bus
transportation; and

(g) Whether waivers of
state laws or local policies and agreements are needed. Waiver provisions in
existence before January 1, 2001, are to be used to obtain the waivers, under
an expedited decision-making process if necessary.

(6) The superintendent
of public instruction, or the superintendent's designee, and the school district
shall jointly negotiate and adopt the terms of a performance agreement to
implement the school improvement plan. The agreement shall be developed in
consultation with the school's staff, parents, and major employee
organizations. The duration of a performance agreement shall be two school
years for schools that have voluntarily accepted focused assistance and one
school year for school districts that have been directed to accept focused
assistance. The agreement may be renewed with the approval of the academic
achievement and accountability commission. The performance agreements shall
include, but not be limited to a description of:

(a) Student performance
goals and expectations;

(b) How existing funds
will be used more effectively;

(c) How additional
focused assistance resources, if any, will be used;

(d) How the most
significant barriers to improvement will be addressed;

(e) What actions the
district and state will take to assist the school;

(f) Whether students
attending the school have the choice of transferring to other public schools in
the district, and whether this choice includes free bus transportation;

(g) Which specific
waivers, if any, of state laws or local policies and agreements are needed.
Waiver provisions in existence before January 1, 2001, are to be used to obtain
the waivers, under an expedited decision-making process if necessary;

(h) Who is responsible
for implementing the specific actions in the agreement; and

(i) Measurable
benchmarks for actions in the performance agreement with a timeline for
completion against which the district, school, and the state are required to
show progress.

(7) Before final
adoption, the performance agreement shall be submitted to the academic
achievement and accountability commission for the commission's review and
comment.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
6. A new section is added
to chapter 28A.655 RCW to read as follows:

After June 15, 2002,
annually the superintendent of public instruction and the academic achievement
and accountability commission shall jointly analyze assessment results of any
schools that were notified of their eligibility but did not receive focused
assistance in the previous year due to the school district's decision to
decline the assistance. Based on the analysis conducted under this section, if
the academic achievement and accountability commission determines the students
in a school are not making sufficient progress toward improved achievement, the
superintendent of public instruction shall direct the school district to accept
focused assistance on behalf of the eligible school under sections 4 and 5 of
this act. The superintendent of public instruction or the superintendent's
designee and the school district shall jointly negotiate and adopt a
performance agreement. However, if the district or school fails to conduct
this process in good faith, the superintendent of public instruction shall
recommend to the commission that state sanctions be imposed.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
7. A new section is added
to chapter 28A.655 RCW to read as follows:

(1) The superintendent
of public instruction, or the superintendent's designee shall analyze the
implementation of a performance agreement after the agreement has been in
effect for one year. Upon completion, the superintendent shall provide the
analysis to the academic achievement and accountability commission. The focus
of the analysis shall be the degree to which implementation benchmarks and
timelines in the agreement have been met.

(2) Two years after a
performance agreement is approved for a school district that has accepted
voluntary assistance, and one year after a performance agreement has been
approved for a school district that has received involuntary assistance, the
superintendent of public instruction and the academic achievement and
accountability commission shall jointly evaluate progress on the performance
agreement implementation benchmarks and the degree to which students in the
school have met or exceeded the student performance expectations described in
the agreement. The evaluation shall use multiple sources of information that
may include, but are not limited to, the information included in the academic
audit and the needs assessment required in section 4 of this act.

(3) Based on the
results of the evaluation, the superintendent of public instruction shall
recommend to the commission that the performance agreement be:

(a) Terminated because
the agreement was successfully completed;

(b) Extended with existing
or newly negotiated conditions; or

(c) Replaced with state
sanctions. The superintendent of public instruction shall recommend the
implementation of state sanctions if the superintendent finds that the school
district and school are making insufficient progress in improving student
learning or insufficient progress in implementation of the performance
agreement.

(4) The superintendent
of public instruction shall notify the district of the results of the
evaluation and the superintendent's recommendations to the commission.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
8. (1) The academic
achievement and accountability commission shall analyze the intervention
strategies used by other states and nations and the success of those strategies
in improving student achievement. Based on this analysis, the commission shall
recommend a process and specific strategies for the implementation of state
sanctions in schools and school districts that are making insufficient progress
in improving student achievement and implementing performance agreements. The
process shall include increasingly intensive sanction strategies and
appropriate notice and due process provisions.

(2) The strategies
shall include a required renegotiation of collective bargaining agreements, an
automatic waiver of the state continuing contract law for certificated
employees, and automatic interdistrict and intradistrict enrollment options for
students assigned to the identified school.

(3) The commission
shall report its recommendations to the governor and the legislative education
and fiscal committees by November 30, 2002.

Sec. 9. RCW 28A.300.040 and 1999
c 348 s 6 are each amended to read as follows:

In addition to any
other powers and duties as provided by law, the powers and duties of the
superintendent of public instruction shall be:

(1) To have supervision
over all matters pertaining to the public schools of the state;

(2) To report to the
governor and the legislature such information and data as may be required for
the management and improvement of the schools;

(3) To prepare and have
printed such forms, registers, courses of study, rules for the government of
the common schools, and such other material and books as may be necessary for
the discharge of the duties of teachers and officials charged with the
administration of the laws relating to the common schools, and to distribute
the same to educational service district superintendents;

(4) To travel, without
neglecting his or her other official duties as superintendent of public
instruction, for the purpose of attending educational meetings or conventions,
of visiting schools, of consulting educational service district superintendents
or other school officials;

(5) To prepare and from
time to time to revise a manual of the Washington state common school code,
copies of which shall be provided in such numbers as determined by the
superintendent of public instruction at no cost to those public agencies within
the common school system and which shall be sold at approximate actual cost of
publication and distribution per volume to all other public and nonpublic agencies
or individuals, said manual to contain Titles 28A and 28C RCW, rules related to
the common schools, and such other matter as the state superintendent or the
state board of education shall determine. Proceeds of the sale of such code
shall be transmitted to the public printer who shall credit the state
superintendent's account within the state printing plant revolving fund by a
like amount;

(6) To act as ex
officio member and the chief executive officer of the state board of education;

(7) To file all papers,
reports and public documents transmitted to the superintendent by the school
officials of the several counties or districts of the state, each year
separately. Copies of all papers filed in the superintendent's office, and the
superintendent's official acts, may, or upon request, shall be certified by the
superintendent and attested by the superintendent's official seal, and when so
certified shall be evidence of the papers or acts so certified to;

(8) To require
annually, on or before the 15th day of August, of the president, manager, or
principal of every educational institution in this state, a report as required
by the superintendent of public instruction; and it is the duty of every
president, manager or principal, to complete and return such forms within such
time as the superintendent of public instruction shall direct;

(9) To keep in the
superintendent's office a record of all teachers receiving certificates to
teach in the common schools of this state;

(10) To issue
certificates as provided by law;

(11) To keep in the
superintendent's office at the capital of the state, all books and papers
pertaining to the business of the superintendent's office, and to keep and
preserve in the superintendent's office a complete record of statistics, as
well as a record of the meetings of the state board of education;

(12) With the
assistance of the office of the attorney general, to decide all points of law
which may be submitted to the superintendent in writing by any educational
service district superintendent, or that may be submitted to the superintendent
by any other person, upon appeal from the decision of any educational service
district superintendent; and the superintendent shall publish his or her
rulings and decisions from time to time for the information of school officials
and teachers; and the superintendent's decision shall be final unless set aside
by a court of competent jurisdiction;

(13) To administer
oaths and affirmations in the discharge of the superintendent's official
duties;

(14) To deliver to his
or her successor, at the expiration of the superintendent's term of office, all
records, books, maps, documents and papers of whatever kind belonging to the
superintendent's office or which may have been received by the superintendent's
for the use of the superintendent's office;

(15) To administer
family services and programs to promote the state's policy as provided in RCW
74.14A.025;

(16) To adopt
contracts with school districts for the implementation of performance
agreements pursuant to chapter 28A.655 RCW and, after June 30, 2004, to
implement any state sanctions authorized under chapter 28A.655 RCW; and

(17) To perform
such other duties as may be required by law.

Sec. 10. RCW 28A.405.210 and 1996
c 201 s 1 are each amended to read as follows:

No teacher, principal,
supervisor, superintendent, or other certificated employee, holding a position
as such with a school district, hereinafter referred to as
"employee", shall be employed except by written order of a majority
of the directors of the district at a regular or special meeting thereof, nor
unless he or she is the holder of an effective teacher's certificate or other
certificate required by law or the state board of education for the position
for which the employee is employed.

The board shall make
with each employee employed by it a written contract, which shall be in
conformity with the laws of this state, and except as otherwise provided by
law, limited to a term of not more than one year. Every such contract shall be
made in duplicate, one copy to be retained by the school district
superintendent or secretary and one copy to be delivered to the employee. No
contract shall be offered by any board for the employment of any employee who
has previously signed an employment contract for that same term in another
school district of the state of Washington unless such employee shall have been
released from his or her obligations under such previous contract by the board
of directors of the school district to which he or she was obligated. Any
contract signed in violation of this provision shall be void.

In the event it is
determined that there is probable cause or causes that the employment contract
of an employee should not be renewed by the district for the next ensuing term
such employee shall be notified in writing on or before May 15th preceding the
commencement of such term of that determination, or if the omnibus
appropriations act has not passed the legislature by May 15th, then
notification shall be no later than June 1st, which notification shall specify
the cause or causes for nonrenewal of contract. Such determination of probable
cause for certificated employees, other than the superintendent, shall be made by
the superintendent. Such notice shall be served upon the employee personally,
or by certified or registered mail, or by leaving a copy of the notice at the
house of his or her usual abode with some person of suitable age and discretion
then resident therein. Every such employee so notified, at his or her request
made in writing and filed with the president, chair or secretary of the board
of directors of the district within ten days after receiving such notice, shall
be granted opportunity for hearing pursuant to RCW 28A.405.310 to determine
whether there is sufficient cause or causes for nonrenewal of contract:
PROVIDED, That any employee receiving notice of nonrenewal of contract due to
an enrollment decline or loss of revenue may, in his or her request for a
hearing, stipulate that initiation of the arrangements for a hearing officer as
provided for by RCW 28A.405.310(4) shall occur within ten days following July
15 rather than the day that the employee submits the request for a hearing. If
any such notification or opportunity for hearing is not timely given, the
employee entitled thereto shall be conclusively presumed to have been
reemployed by the district for the next ensuing term upon contractual terms
identical with those which would have prevailed if his or her employment had
actually been renewed by the board of directors for such ensuing term.

This section shall not
be applicable to "provisional employees" as so designated in RCW
28A.405.220; transfer to a subordinate certificated position as that procedure
is set forth in RCW 28A.405.230 shall not be construed as a nonrenewal of
contract for the purposes of this section.

No earlier than July
1, 2004, the requirements of this section shall be waived in a school in which
state sanctions have been imposed under chapter 28A.655 RCW.

Sec. 11. RCW 28A.405.230 and 1996
c 201 s 3 are each amended to read as follows:

Any certificated
employee of a school district employed as an assistant superintendent,
director, principal, assistant principal, coordinator, or in any other
supervisory or administrative position, hereinafter in this section referred to
as "administrator", shall be subject to transfer, at the expiration
of the term of his or her employment contract, to any subordinate certificated
position within the school district. "Subordinate certificated
position" as used in this section, shall mean any administrative or
nonadministrative certificated position for which the annual compensation is
less than the position currently held by the administrator.

Every superintendent
determining that the best interests of the school district would be served by
transferring any administrator to a subordinate certificated position shall
notify that administrator in writing on or before May 15th preceding the
commencement of such school term of that determination, or if the omnibus
appropriations act has not passed the legislature by May 15th, then
notification shall be no later than June 1st, which notification shall state
the reason or reasons for the transfer, and shall identify the subordinate
certificated position to which the administrator will be transferred. Such
notice shall be served upon the administrator personally, or by certified or
registered mail, or by leaving a copy of the notice at the place of his or her
usual abode with some person of suitable age and discretion then resident
therein.

Every such
administrator so notified, at his or her request made in writing and filed with
the president or chair, or secretary of the board of directors of the district
within ten days after receiving such notice, shall be given the opportunity to
meet informally with the board of directors in an executive session thereof for
the purpose of requesting the board to reconsider the decision of the
superintendent. Such board, upon receipt of such request, shall schedule the
meeting for no later than the next regularly scheduled meeting of the board,
and shall notify the administrator in writing of the date, time and place of
the meeting at least three days prior thereto. At such meeting the
administrator shall be given the opportunity to refute any facts upon which the
determination was based and to make any argument in support of his or her
request for reconsideration. The administrator and the board may invite their
respective legal counsel to be present and to participate at the meeting. The
board shall notify the administrator in writing of its final decision within
ten days following its meeting with the administrator. No appeal to the courts
shall lie from the final decision of the board of directors to transfer an
administrator to a subordinate certificated position: PROVIDED, That in the
case of principals such transfer shall be made at the expiration of the
contract year and only during the first three consecutive school years of
employment as a principal by a school district; except that if any such
principal has been previously employed as a principal by another school
district in the state of Washington for three or more consecutive school years
the provisions of this section shall apply only to the first full school year
of such employment.

This section applies to
any person employed as an administrator by a school district on June 25, 1976
and to all persons so employed at any time thereafter. This section provides
the exclusive means for transferring an administrator to a subordinate
certificated position at the expiration of the term of his or her employment
contract.

No earlier than July
1, 2004, the requirements of this section shall be waived in a school in which
state sanctions have been imposed under chapter 28A.655 RCW.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
12. A new section is added
to chapter 41.56 RCW to read as follows:

After June 30, 2004, if
a collective bargaining agreement entered into under this chapter after the
effective date of this section conflicts with or prevents implementation of a
sanction adopted, or a decision or action required under such a sanction by the
superintendent of public instruction under chapter 28A.655 RCW, the parties to
the agreement must immediately enter into collective bargaining for a mutually
agreed upon modification of the agreement.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
13. A new section is added
to chapter 41.59 RCW to read as follows:

After June 30, 2004, if
a collective bargaining agreement entered into under this chapter after the
effective date of this section conflicts with or prevents implementation of a
sanction adopted, or a decision or action required under such a sanction by the
superintendent of public instruction under chapter 28A.655 RCW, the parties to
the agreement must immediately enter into collective bargaining for a mutually
agreed upon modification of the agreement.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
14. A new section is added
to chapter 28A.320 RCW to read as follows:

Each school district
shall adopt a policy allowing the automatic intradistrict and interdistrict
transfer and acceptance of students from schools that are the subject of state
sanctions under chapter 28A.655 RCW after June 30, 2004.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
15. A new section is added
to chapter 28A.300 RCW to read as follows:

The superintendent of
public instruction shall recognize and honor each school that has met or
exceeded the state minimum fourth grade reading goal for the school, as defined
in RCW 28A.655.050, on the 2001 Washington assessment of student learning.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
16. RCW 28A.655.035 (Accountability policies‑-Recommendations)
and 1999 c 388 s 103 are each repealed.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
17. RCW 28A.655.050 (Reading
goals--Mathematics goals) and 1999 c 388 s 201 & 1998 c 319 s 101 are each
repealed.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 18. If specific funding for
the purposes of this act, referencing this act by bill or chapter number, is
not provided by June 30, 2001, in the omnibus appropriations act, this act is
null and void.

---
END ---