BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF
WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec.
1. The purpose of this act
is to respond to State v. Thomas, . . . Wn. App.
. . . (Cause No. 24962-6-II, December 21, 2000), by reenacting,
without changes, the law prohibiting materially false or misleading statements
to public servants, enacted as sections 32 and 33, chapter 285, Laws of 1995.

Sec. 2. RCW 9A.76.175 and 1995 c
285 s 32 are each reenacted to read as follows:

A person
who knowingly makes a false or misleading material statement to a public
servant is guilty of a gross misdemeanor. "Material statement" means
a written or oral statement reasonably likely to be relied upon by a public
servant in the discharge of his or her official powers or duties.

Sec. 3. RCW 9A.76.020 and 1995 c
285 s 33 are each reenacted to read as follows:

(1) A person is guilty
of obstructing a law enforcement officer if the person willfully hinders,
delays, or obstructs any law enforcement officer in the discharge of his or her
official powers or duties.

(2) "Law
enforcement officer" means any general authority, limited authority, or
specially commissioned Washington peace officer or federal peace officer as
those terms are defined in RCW 10.93.020, and other public officers who are
responsible for enforcement of fire, building, zoning, and life and safety
codes.

(3) Obstructing a law
enforcement officer is a gross misdemeanor.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 4. This act is necessary for
the immediate preservation of the public peace, health, or safety, or support
of the state government and its existing public institutions, and takes effect
immediately.

---
END ---