BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF
WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1. RCW 46.55.100 and 1999 c
398 s 5 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) At the time of
impoundment the registered tow truck operator providing the towing service
shall give immediate notification, by telephone or radio, to a law enforcement
agency having jurisdiction who shall maintain a log of such reports. A law
enforcement agency, or a private communication center acting on behalf of a law
enforcement agency, shall within six to twelve hours of the impoundment,
provide to a requesting operator the name and address of the legal and
registered owners of the vehicle, and the legal and registered owners
of any personal property registered or titled with the department that is
attached to or contained in or on the impounded vehicle, the vehicle identification
number, and any other necessary, pertinent information. The initial notice of
impoundment shall be followed by a written or electronic facsimile notice
within twenty-four hours. In the case of a vehicle from another state, time
requirements of this subsection do not apply until the requesting law
enforcement agency in this state receives the information.

(2) When a vehicle
record or a record of items of personal property registered or titled with the
department that are in the operator's possession after the one hundred
twenty-hour abandonment period is marked as reported sold and the information
was not available at the time of original request for registered and legal
owners information, the operator shall immediately ((send an abandoned
vehicle report to)) request the report of sale data filed with the
department ((for any vehicle, and for any items of personal property
registered or titled with the department, that are in the operator's possession
after the one hundred twenty hour abandonment period. Such report)).
The department shall provide the registered tow truck operator with the report
of sale data and any other necessary, pertinent information within seventy-two
hours of receipt of the request. The request need not be sent when the
impoundment is pursuant to a writ, court order, or police hold that is not a
suspended license impound. The owner notification and abandonment process
shall be initiated by the registered tow truck operator immediately following
notification by a court or law enforcement officer that the writ, court order,
or police hold that is not a suspended license impound is no longer in effect.

(3) ((Following the
submittal of an abandoned vehicle report, the department shall provide the
registered tow truck operator with owner information within seventy-two hours.

(4))) Within fourteen days of the sale of an
abandoned vehicle at public auction, the towing operator shall send a copy of
the abandoned vehicle report showing the disposition of the abandoned vehicle
and any other items of personal property registered or titled with the
department to the crime information center of the Washington state patrol.

(((5) If the
operator sends an abandoned vehicle report to the department and the department
finds)) (4) If no owner information is found in the department's
records, an operator may proceed with an inspection of the vehicle and any
other items of personal property registered or titled with the department to
determine whether owner identification is within the vehicle.

(((6)))
(5) If the operator finds no owner identification, the operator shall
immediately notify the appropriate law enforcement agency, which shall search
the vehicle and any other items of personal property registered or titled with
the department for the vehicle identification number or other appropriate
identification numbers and check the necessary records to determine the
vehicle's or other property's owners.

--- END ---