BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF
WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1. RCW 46.20.205 and 1999 c
6 s 24 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) Whenever any person
after applying for or receiving a driver's license or identicard moves from the
address named in the application or in the license or identicard issued to him
or her, the person shall within ten days thereafter notify the department of
the address change. The notification must be in writing on a form provided by
the department and must include the number of the person's driver's license.
The written notification, or other means as designated by rule of the
department, is the exclusive means by which the address of record maintained by
the department concerning the licensee or identicard holder may be changed.

(a) The form must contain
a place for the person to indicate that the address change is not for voting
purposes. The department of licensing shall notify the secretary of state by
the means described in RCW 29.07.270(3) of all change of address information
received by means of this form except information on persons indicating that
the change is not for voting purposes.

(b) Any notice
regarding the cancellation, suspension, revocation, disqualification,
probation, or nonrenewal of the driver's license, commercial driver's license,
driving privilege, or identicard mailed to the address of record of the
licensee or identicard holder is effective notwithstanding the licensee's or
identicard holder's failure to receive the notice. For purposes of this
subsection, the address of record is the person's mailing address where the
department has a mailing address on record that differs from the person's
residence address.

(2) When a licensee or
holder of an identicard changes his or her name of record, the person shall
notify the department of the name change. The person must make the
notification within ten days of the date that the name change is effective.
The notification must be in writing on a form provided by the department and must
include the number of the person's driver's license. The department of
licensing shall not change the name of record of a person under this section
unless the person has again satisfied the department regarding his or her
identity in the manner provided by RCW 46.20.035.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 2. This act is necessary for
the immediate preservation of the public peace, health, or safety, or support
of the state government and its existing public institutions, and takes effect
July 1, 2001.

---
END ---