BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF
WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1. RCW 46.82.350 and 1979
ex.s. c 51 s 8 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) The director may
suspend, revoke, deny, or refuse to renew an instructor's license or a driver
training school license for any of the following causes:

(a) Upon determination
that the licensee has made a false statement or concealed any material fact in
connection with the application or license renewal;

(b) Upon ((conviction
of)) determination that the applicant, licensee, or any person
directly or indirectly interested in the driver training school's business has
been convicted of a felony, or any crime involving violence, dishonesty,
deceit, indecency, degeneracy, or moral turpitude;

(c) Upon determination
that the applicant, licensee, or any person directly or indirectly interested
in the driver training school's business previously held a driver training
school license which was revoked, suspended, or refused renewal by the
director;

(d) Upon determination
that the applicant or licensee does not have a place of business as required by
this chapter;

(e) Upon determination
that the applicant or licensee has failed to require all persons with financial
interest in the driver training school to be signatories to the application;

(f) Upon determination
that the applicant or licensee has been found guilty of fraud or fraudulent
practices in relation to the business conducted under the license, or guilty of
inducing another to resort to fraud in relation to securing for himself,
herself, or another a license to drive a motor vehicle; or

(g) Upon
determination that the applicant or licensee fails to satisfy or no longer
meets the requirements for taking a license examination, issuance of a
license, or other conditions stated in this chapter.

--- END ---