BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF
WASHINGTON:

_6 Sec. 1. RCW 67.16.200
and 2000 c 223 s 1 are each amended to read

_7 as follows:

_8 (1) A racing association licensed by the commission to
conduct

_9 a race meet may seek approval from the commission to
conduct

10 parimutuel wagering on its program at a satellite location
or

11 locations within the state of Washington. The sale of
parimutuel

12 pools at satellite locations shall be conducted only during
the

13 licensee's race meet and simultaneous to all parimutuel
wagering

14 activity conducted at the licensee's live racing facility
in the

15 state of Washington. The commission's authority to approve

16 satellite wagering at a particular location is subject to
the

17 following limitations:

18 (a) The commission may approve only one satellite
location in

p. 1 ESHB
1571

_1 each county in the state; however, the commission may
grant

_2 approval for more than one licensee to conduct wagering
at each

_3 satellite location. A satellite location shall not be
operated

_4 within twenty driving miles of any class 1 racing
facility. For the

_5 purposes of this section, "driving miles"
means miles measured by

_6 the most direct route as determined by the commission;
and

_7 (b) A licensee shall not conduct satellite wagering
at any

_8 satellite location within sixty driving miles of any
other racing

_9 facility conducting a live race meet.

10 (2) Subject to local zoning and other land use
ordinances, the

11 commission shall be the sole judge of whether approval
to conduct

12 wagering at a satellite location shall be granted.

13 (3) The licensee shall combine the parimutuel pools
of the

14 satellite location with those of the racing facility for
the

15 purpose of determining odds and computing payoffs. The
amount

16 wagered at the satellite location shall be combined with
the

17 amount wagered at the racing facility for the
application of take

18 out formulas and distribution as provided in RCW
67.16.102,

19 67.16.105, 67.16.170, and 67.16.175. A satellite
extension of the

20 licensee's racing facility shall be subject to the same

21 application of the rules of racing as the licensee's
racing

22 facility.

23 (4) Upon written application to the commission, a
class 1

24 racing association may be authorized to transmit
simulcasts of

25 live horse races conducted at its racetrack to locations
outside

26 of the state of Washington approved by the commission
and in

27 accordance with the interstate horse racing act of 1978
(15 U.S.C.

28 Sec. 3001 to 3007) or any other applicable laws. The commission
may

29 permit parimutuel pools on the simulcast races to be
combined in a

30 common pool. A racing association that transmits
simulcasts of its

31 races to locations outside this state shall pay at least
fifty

32 percent of the fee that it receives for sale of the
simulcast

33 signal to the horsemen's purse account for its live
races after

34 first deducting the actual cost of sending the signal
out of

35 state.

36 (5) Upon written application to the commission, a
class 1

37 racing association may be authorized to transmit
simulcasts of

38 live horse races conducted at its racetrack to licensed
racing

ESHB 1571 p. 2

_1 associations located within the state of Washington and
approved

_2 by the commission for the receipt of the simulcasts.
The commission

_3 shall permit parimutuel pools on the simulcast races to
be

_4 combined in a common pool. The fee for in-state,
track-to-track

_5 simulcasts shall be five and one-half percent of the
gross

_6 parimutuel receipts generated at the receiving location
and

_7 payable to the sending racing association. A racing
association

_8 that transmits simulcasts of its races to other licensed
racing

_9 associations shall pay at least fifty percent of the fee
that it

10 receives for the simulcast signal to the horsemen's
purse account

11 for its live race meet after first deducting the actual
cost of

12 sending the simulcast signal. A racing association that
receives

13 races simulcast from class 1 racing associations within
the state

14 shall pay at least fifty percent of its share of the
parimutuel

15 receipts to the horsemen's purse account for its live
race meet

16 after first deducting the purchase price and the actual
direct

17 costs of importing the race.

18 (6) A class 1 racing association may be allowed to
import

19 simulcasts of horse races from out-of-state racing
facilities.

20 With the prior approval of the commission, the class 1
racing

21 association may participate in an interstate common pool
and may

22 change its commission and breakage rates to achieve a
common rate

23 with other participants in the common pool.

24 (a) The class 1 racing association shall make
written

25 application with the commission for permission to import
simulcast

26 horse races for the purpose of parimutuel wagering.
Subject to the

27 terms of this section, the commission is the sole
authority in

28 determining whether to grant approval for an imported
simulcast

29 race.

30 (b) ((During the conduct of its race meeting, a
class 1 racing

31 association may be allowed to import no more than one
simulcast

32 race card program during each live race day.)) A
licensed racing

33 association may also be approved to import one simulcast
race of

34 regional or national interest on each live race day. ((A
class 1

35 racing association may be permitted to import two
simulcast

36 programs on two nonlive race days per each week
during its live

37 meet. A licensee shall not operate parimutuel
wagering on more than

38 five days per week. Parimutuel wagering on imported
simulcast

p. 3 ESHB
1571

_1 programs shall only be conducted at the live racing
facility of a

_2 class 1 racing association.))

_3 (c) The commission may allow simulcast races of regional
or

_4 national interest to be sent to satellite locations.
The simulcasts

_5 shall be limited to one per day except for Breeder's Cup
special

_6 events day.

_7 (d) When open for parimutuel wagering, a class 1
racing

_8 association which imports simulcast races shall also
conduct

_9 simulcast parimutuel wagering within its licensed racing
enclosure

10 on all races simulcast from other class 1 racing
associations

11 within the state of Washington.

12 (e) ((When not conducting a live race meeting, a
class 1 racing

13 association may be approved to conduct simulcast
parimutuel

14 wagering on imported simulcast races.)) The
conduct of

15 ((simulcast)) parimutuel wagering on ((the))
imported simulcast

16 races shall be for not more than fourteen hours during
any twenty-

17 four hour period, for not more than five days per week
and only at

18 ((its)) the live racing facility of a
class 1 racing association.

19 (f) On any imported simulcast race, the class 1
racing

20 association shall pay fifty percent of its share of the
parimutuel

21 receipts to the horsemen's purse account for its live
race meet

22 after first deducting the purchase price of the imported
race and

23 the actual costs of importing the race.

24 (7) For purposes of this section, a class 1 racing
association

25 is defined as a licensee approved by the commission to
conduct

26 during each twelve-month period at least forty days of
live

27 racing. If a live race day is canceled due to reasons
directly

28 attributable to acts of God, labor disruptions affecting
live race

29 days but not directly involving the licensee or its
employees, or

30 other circumstances that the commission decides are
beyond the

31 control of the class 1 racing association, then the
canceled day

32 counts toward the forty-day requirement. The commission
may by rule

33 increase the number of live racing days required to
maintain class

34 1 racing association status or make other rules
necessary to

35 implement this section.

36 (8) This section does not establish a new form of
gaming in

37 Washington or allow expanded gaming within the state
beyond what

38 has been previously authorized. Simulcast wagering has
been allowed

ESHB 1571 p. 4

_1 in Washington before April 19, 1997. Therefore, this
section does

_2 not allow gaming of any nature or scope that was
prohibited before

_3 April 19, 1997. This section is necessary to protect
the Washington

_4 equine breeding and racing industries, and in particular
those

_5 sectors of these industries that are dependent upon live
horse

_6 racing. The purpose of this section is to protect these
industries

_7 from adverse economic impacts and to promote fan
attendance at

_8 class 1 racing facilities. Therefore, imported
simulcast race card

_9 programs shall not be disseminated to any location
outside the

10 live racing facility of the class 1 racing association
and a class

11 1 racing association is strictly prohibited from simulcasting

12 imported race card programs to any location outside its
live

13 racing facility.

14 (9) A licensee shall include the following
statement in any

15 advertising or promotion of a simulcast race
conducted by the

16 licensee:

17 "CAUTION: Participation in gambling activity
may result in

18 pathological gambling behavior causing emotional and
financial

19 harm. For help, call 1-800-547-6133."

20 For purposes of this subsection, advertising
includes print

21 media, point-of-sale advertising, electronic media,
billboards,

22 and radio advertising.

‑‑‑ END ‑‑‑

p. 5 ESHB
1571