BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF
WASHINGTON:

_4 NEW SECTION. Sec. 1. A new section is
added to chapter 4.16 RCW

_5 to read as follows:

_6 This section is an absolute bar to all claims or
causes of

_7 action set forth in RCW 4.16.300 until written notice of
an

_8 alleged defect as required by this section is served
upon a person

_9 referenced in RCW 4.16.300. The person referenced must
be allowed a

10 period of thirty days after proper notice to demand
inspection of

11 the alleged defect and to declare an intent to exercise
a right to

12 cure the alleged defect within a reasonable time. This
section does

13 not require any person to perform a cure, but sets out a
voluntary

14 right to cure and this declaration of intent to cure shall
not be

15 construed as an admission of fault. A declaration is a
further bar

16 to all claims or causes of action set forth in RCW
4.16.300 for a

17 reasonable period of time as required to perform
substantial

18 completion of the cure as provided in RCW 4.16.310.

‑‑‑ END ‑‑‑

p. 1 HB
1572