BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF
WASHINGTON:

_5 Sec. 1. RCW
84.40.0305 and 1997 c 3 s 105 are each amended to read

_6 as follows:

_7 (1) As used in this section:

_8 (a) "Previous assessed value" means the
assessed value for the

_9 year immediately preceding the year for which a
calculation is

10 being made under this section.

11 (b) "Current appraised value" means the
appraised value for the

12 year for which a calculation is being made under this
section.

13 (c) "Total value increase" means the
current appraised value

14 minus the previous assessed value. Total value increase
can never

15 be less than zero.

16 (d) "Improvement increase" means the
portion of the total value

17 increase attributable to any physical improvements made
to the

18 property since the previous assessment, other than improvements

p. 1 HB
1573

_1 exempt under RCW 84.36.400 for the year for which a
calculation is

_2 being made under this section. Improvement increase can
never be

_3 less than zero.

_4 (e) "Market increase" means the total
value increase minus the

_5 improvement increase. Market increase can never be less
than

_6 zero.

_7 (2) The assessed value of property is equal to the
lesser of

_8 the current appraised value or a limited value determined
under

_9 this section. The limited value is equal to the greater
of the

10 values determined as follows:

11 (a) In any year in which the market increase is
equal to or

12 less than sixty percent of the previous assessed
value, the

13 limited value is the improvement increase plus
one hundred fifteen

14 percent of the previous assessed value; or

15 (b) In any year in which the market increase is
more than sixty

16 percent of the previous assessed value, the limited
value for the

17 year of the increase and for each of the three
succeeding years is

18 not less than the sum of:

19 (i) The previous assessed value;

20 (ii) The improvement increase; and

21 (iii) Twenty-five percent of the market increase.

22 (3) Upon loss of preferential tax treatment for
property that

23 qualifies for preferential tax treatment under chapter
84.14,

24 84.26, 84.33, 84.34, or 84.36 RCW, the previous assessed
value

25 shall be the assessed value the property would have had
without

26 the preferential tax treatment.

27 (4) The assessed value of real property that has
been

28 subdivided or merged is the current appraised value
of the parcel

29 or lot formed after the subdivision or merger.

30 (5) The assessed value of new construction and
mobile homes

31 under RCW 36.21.080 and 36.21.090 is determined
without regard to

32 this section.

33 NEW SECTION. Sec. 2. This act takes effect
for taxes levied in

34 2001 for collection in 2002 and thereafter if the
proposed

35 amendment to Article VII, section 1 of the state
Constitution

36 providing for valuation increases to be phased-in over a
period of

37 four years is validly submitted to and is approved and
ratified by

HB 1573 p. 2

_1 the voters at the next general election. If the
proposed

_2 amendment is not approved and ratified, this act is void
in its

_3 entirety.

‑‑‑ END ‑‑‑

p. 3 HB
1573