BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF
WASHINGTON:

_8 Sec. 1. RCW
74.39A.005 and 2000 c 121 s 9 are each amended to read

_9 as follows:

10 The legislature finds that the aging of the
population and

11 advanced medical technology have resulted in a growing
number of

12 persons who require assistance. The primary resource
for long-term

13 care continues to be family and friends. However, these
traditional

14 caregivers are increasingly employed outside the home.
There is a

15 growing demand for improvement and expansion of home and
community-

16 based long-term care services to support and
complement the

17 services provided by these informal caregivers.

18 The legislature further finds that the public
interest would

p. 1 HB
1576

_1 best be served by a broad array of long-term care
services that

_2 support persons who need such services at home or in the
community

_3 whenever practicable and that promote individual
autonomy,

_4 dignity, and choice.

_5 The legislature finds that as other long-term care
options

_6 become more available, the relative need for nursing
home beds is

_7 likely to decline. The legislature recognizes, however,
that

_8 nursing home care will continue to be a critical part of
the

_9 state's long-term care options, and that such services
should

10 promote individual dignity, autonomy, and a homelike
environment.

11 The legislature finds that many recipients of
in-home services

12 are vulnerable and their health and well-being are
dependent on

13 their caregivers. The quality, skills, and knowledge of
their

14 caregivers are often the key to good care. The
legislature finds

15 that the need for well-trained caregivers is growing as
the

16 state's population ages and clients' needs increase.
The

17 legislature intends that current training standards be
enhanced

18 and that an entity be established that has the
authority to

19 recruit, train, stabilize, and improve the individual
provider

20 work force.

21 NEW SECTION. Sec. 2. AUTHORIZATION OF HOME
CARE QUALITY

22 AUTHORITY. (1) The governor shall establish a home care
quality

23 authority to recruit, train, stabilize, and improve the
individual

24 provider work force as provided in this act. The
authority shall

25 constitute a political subdivision of the state established
as an

26 instrumentality exercising essential governmental
functions. The

27 authority shall be established within six months of the
enactment

28 of this act.

29 (2) The home care quality authority shall consist of
nine

30 members appointed by the governor. The governing board
of the

31 authority shall be as follows: Five members of the
governing board

32 shall be current or former consumers of home care
services for the

33 elderly or people with disabilities, at least one of
whom shall be

34 a person with a developmental disability; one member of
the

35 governing board shall be a representative of the
developmental

36 disabilities planning council; one member shall be a

37 representative of the governor's commission on
disability and

HB 1576 p. 2

_1 employment; one member shall be a representative of the
state

_2 council on aging; and one member shall be a
representative of the

_3 Washington state association of area agencies on aging.
The term of

_4 office of each member will be three years. If there is
a vacancy

_5 for any cause, the governor shall make an appointment to
become

_6 immediately effective for the unexpired term. A member
is eligible

_7 for reappointment and may serve no more than two
consecutive

_8 terms. In making appointments to the authority, the
governor shall

_9 take into consideration any nominations or
recommendations made by

10 the representative groups or agencies.

11 NEW SECTION. Sec. 3. DUTIES. The
department shall contract with

12 the home care quality authority to carry out the
following duties

13 and functions:

14 (1) Ensure that in-home long-term care services are
provided to

15 functionally disabled people who are authorized to
receive

16 services in their home under the medicaid personal care,
community

17 options programs entry system, or chore services program
through

18 an individual provider chosen and supervised by the
functionally

19 disabled person;

20 (2)(a) Establish and investigate the qualifications
and

21 background of potential individual providers. Any
qualifications

22 established shall include: (i) Compliance with the
minimum

23 requirements for training and criminal background checks
as

24 provided in RCW 74.39A.050; and (ii) confirmation that
the

25 potential individual provider is not currently listed on
any long-

26 term care abuse and neglect registry currently in use,
or

27 established at some future date.

28 (b) The department shall: (i) Continue to perform
the criminal

29 background check for individual providers; and (ii)
ensure that

30 the authority has ready access to any long-term care
abuse and

31 neglect registry currently in use, or established at
some future

32 date.

33 (c) The authority must give preference to the
training and

34 employment of recipients of public assistance or other
low-income

35 persons who would qualify for public assistance in the
absence of

36 such employment;

p. 3 HB
1576

_1 (3) Provide training opportunities, either directly
or through

_2 contract, for individual providers and functionally
disabled

_3 persons as consumers of personal care services;

_4 (4) Provide assistance to functionally disabled
persons in

_5 finding individual providers through the establishment
of a

_6 referral list of qualified individual providers;

_7 (5) Provide routine, emergency, and respite
referrals of

_8 qualified individual providers to functionally disabled
people who

_9 are authorized to receive services in their home under
the

10 medicaid personal care, community options programs entry
system,

11 or chore services program through an individual provider
hired

12 directly by the functionally disabled person; and

13 (6) Cooperate with area agencies on aging, the
department, and

14 other state and local agencies to provide the services
described

15 and set forth in this section. If, in the course of its
duties, the

16 home care quality authority identifies concerns
regarding the care

17 being provided by an individual provider, the authority
shall

18 notify the relevant area agency on aging or department
case

19 manager regarding its concerns.

20 NEW SECTION. Sec. 4. EMPLOYMENT
RELATIONSHIP AND CONSUMER

21 RIGHTS. (1) The home care quality authority authorized
by this act

22 shall be deemed to be the employer of individual
providers who

23 provide services to functionally disabled persons
authorized to

24 receive such services in their home under the medicaid
personal

25 care, community options programs entry system, or chore
services

26 program for the purpose of the application of chapter
41.56

27 RCW. The authority shall be deemed to be a public
employer as that

28 term is defined in RCW 41.56.030(1) and the individual
providers

29 shall be deemed to be public employees as that term is
defined in

30 RCW 41.56.030(2). The provisions of chapter 41.56 RCW
shall govern

31 the relations between the authority and the individual
providers

32 except: (a) The only unit appropriate for the purpose
of collective

33 bargaining under RCW 41.56.060 shall be a statewide unit
of all

34 individual providers; (b) the showing of interest needed
to

35 request an election under RCW 41.56.060 shall be ten percent
of

36 the unit and any intervener seeking to appear on the
ballot shall

37 make the same showing of interest; (c) the mediation and
interest

HB 1576 p. 4

_1 arbitration provisions of RCW 41.56.430 through
41.56.470 and

_2 41.56.480 shall apply; (d) individual providers shall
not have a

_3 right to strike; and (e) as otherwise expressly provided
in this

_4 act.

_5 (2) The individual providers shall not be considered
employees

_6 of the state of Washington for any purpose.

_7 (3) Functionally disabled persons who are authorized
to receive

_8 services in their home under the medicaid personal care,
community

_9 options programs entry system, or chore services program
through

10 an individual provider retain the right to select, supervise,
and

11 terminate the work of any individual provider providing
services

12 to them. Functionally disabled persons who are
authorized to

13 receive services in their home under the medicaid
personal care,

14 community options programs entry system, or chore
services program

15 through an individual provider may elect to receive
services from

16 individual providers who are not referred to them by the
home care

17 quality authority. Those providers shall be referred to
the

18 authority for the purposes of wages, benefits, and other
terms and

19 conditions of employment.

20 (4) In implementing and administering this act, no
home care

21 quality authority, contractor, or a combination thereof,
shall

22 reduce the hours of service for any functionally
disabled person

23 below the amount determined to be necessary under any
assessment

24 prepared by the department.

25 (5) The home care quality authority authorized under
this act

26 may enter into contracts as are necessary or proper to
carry out

27 this chapter.

28 (6) To the extent permitted by federal law, federal
matching

29 funds under Title XIX of the federal social security act
may be

30 used to establish and operate the home care quality
authority

31 authorized by this act.

32 (7)(a) The home care quality authority authorized
under this

33 act shall be deemed not to be the employer of individual
providers

34 referred to functionally disabled persons under this act
for

35 purposes of vicarious liability due to the negligence or

36 intentional torts of the individual provider.

37 (b) In no case shall the home care quality authority
authorized

38 under this act be held liable for actions or omissions
of any

p. 5 HB
1576

_1 individual provider whom the authority did not include
on its

_2 referral list or otherwise refer to a functionally
disabled person

_3 receiving services in their home under the medicaid
personal care,

_4 community options program entry system, or chore
services program.

_5 (c) The state shall be immune from any liability
resulting from

_6 implementation of this act. Any obligation of the home
care quality

_7 authority pursuant to this act, whether statutory,
contractual, or

_8 otherwise, shall be the obligation solely of the home
care quality

_9 authority, and shall not be the obligation of the state.

10 (8) Nothing in this section shall be construed to
affect the

11 state's responsibility with respect to the state payroll
system or

12 unemployment insurance for individual providers.

13 (9) The home care quality authority may offer its
recruitment,

14 training, and referral services to long-term care
providers other

15 than individual providers for a membership fee fixed by
the

16 authority.

17 NEW SECTION. Sec. 5. PERFORMANCE REVIEW.
(1) Two years after the

18 establishment of the home care quality authority, and
biennially

19 thereafter, the joint legislative audit and review
committee shall

20 perform a performance review of the authority. The
first such

21 review shall be submitted to the legislature and the
governor by

22 December 1st of the year following the initiation of the

23 performance review under this section.

24 (2) The performance review will give special
attention to the

25 health, welfare, and satisfaction with services of the

26 functionally disabled persons receiving services from
individual

27 providers under this act, including the degree to which
all

28 required services have been delivered, the degree to
which

29 functionally disabled persons receiving services from
individual

30 providers have ultimately been placed in other
residential

31 settings or nursing homes, prompt response to consumer
complaints,

32 and any other issue the committee deems relevant.

33 (3) The performance review shall make
recommendations to the

34 legislature and the governor for any changes to this act
that will

35 further ensure the well-being of functionally disabled
persons

36 receiving services from individual providers, and the
most

37 efficient delivery of required services. In addition,
the first

HB 1576 p. 6

_1 performance review must include findings and
recommendations

_2 regarding the appropriateness of the home care quality
authority

_3 assuming responsibility for verification of hours worked
by

_4 individual providers, payment of individual providers,
or other

_5 functions.

_6 NEW SECTION. Sec. 6. APPROVAL OF WAGES AND
BENEFITS. (1) When

_7 any increase in provider wages or benefits is negotiated
or agreed

_8 to by the home care quality authority authorized under
this act,

_9 no increase in wages or benefits negotiated or agreed to
pursuant

10 to this act shall take effect unless and until, prior to
its

11 implementation, the department has determined that the
increase is

12 consistent with federal law and to ensure federal
financial

13 participation for the services under Title XIX of the
federal

14 social security act.

15 (2) Any rate approved pursuant to (a) of this
subsection shall

16 take effect commencing on the first day of the month
subsequent to

17 the month in which final approval is received from the

18 department. The department may grant approval on a
conditional

19 basis, subject to the availability of funding.

20 Sec. 7. RCW
74.39A.030 and 1995 1st sp.s. c 18 s 2 are each

21 amended to read as follows:

22 (1) To the extent of available funding, the
department shall

23 expand cost-effective options for home and community
services for

24 consumers for whom the state participates in the cost of
their

25 care.

26 (2) In expanding home and community services, the
department

27 shall: (a) Take full advantage of federal funding
available under

28 Title XVIII and Title XIX of the federal social security
act,

29 including home health, adult day care, waiver options,
and state

30 plan services; and (b) be authorized to use funds
available under

31 its community options program entry system waiver
granted under

32 section 1915(c) of the federal social security act to
expand the

33 availability of in-home, adult residential care, adult
family

34 homes, enhanced adult residential care, and assisted
living

35 services. By June 30, 1997, the department shall
undertake to

36 reduce the nursing home medicaid census by at least one
thousand

p. 7 HB
1576

_1 six hundred by assisting individuals who would otherwise
require

_2 nursing facility services to obtain services of their
choice,

_3 including assisted living services, enhanced adult
residential

_4 care, and other home and community services. If a
resident, or his

_5 or her legal representative, objects to a discharge
decision

_6 initiated by the department, the resident shall not be
discharged

_7 if the resident has been assessed and determined to
require

_8 nursing facility services. In contracting with nursing
homes and

_9 boarding homes for enhanced adult residential care
placements, the

10 department shall not require, by contract or through
other means,

11 structural modifications to existing building
construction.

12 (3)(a) Except to the extent provided otherwise in
section 6 of

13 this act, the department shall by rule establish
payment rates for

14 home and community services that support the provision
of cost-

15 effective care.

16 (b) The department may authorize an enhanced adult
residential

17 care rate for nursing homes that temporarily or
permanently

18 convert their bed use for the purpose of providing
enhanced adult

19 residential care under chapter 70.38 RCW, when the
department

20 determines that payment of an enhanced rate is
cost-effective and

21 necessary to foster expansion of contracted enhanced
adult

22 residential care services. As an incentive for nursing
homes to

23 permanently convert a portion of its nursing home bed
capacity for

24 the purpose of providing enhanced adult residential
care, the

25 department may authorize a supplemental add-on to the
enhanced

26 adult residential care rate.

27 (c) The department may authorize a supplemental
assisted living

28 services rate for up to four years for facilities that
convert

29 from nursing home use and do not retain rights to the
converted

30 nursing home beds under chapter 70.38 RCW, if the
department

31 determines that payment of a supplemental rate is
cost-effective

32 and necessary to foster expansion of contracted assisted
living

33 services.

34 Sec. 8. RCW
74.39A.095 and 2000 c 87 s 5 are each amended to read

35 as follows:

36 (1) In carrying out case management responsibilities

37 established under RCW 74.39A.090 for consumers who are
receiving

HB 1576 p. 8

_1 services under the medicaid personal care, community
options

_2 programs entry system or chore services program through
an

_3 individual provider, each area agency on aging shall
provide

_4 adequate oversight of the care being provided to
consumers

_5 receiving services under this section. Such oversight
shall

_6 include, but is not limited to:

_7 (a) Verification that ((the)) any
individual provider who has

_8 not been referred to a consumer by the home care
quality authority

_9 established under this act has met any training
requirements

10 established by the department;

11 (b) Verification of a sample of worker time sheets;

12 (c) Home visits or telephone contacts sufficient to
ensure that

13 the plan of care is being appropriately implemented;

14 (d) Reassessment and reauthorization of services;

15 (e) Monitoring of individual provider performance.
If, in the

16 course of its monitoring, the area agency on aging
identifies

17 concerns regarding the care being provided by an
individual

18 provider who was referred to a consumer by the home
care quality

19 authority authorized under this act, the area agency
on aging

20 shall notify the home care quality authority
regarding its

21 concerns; and

22 (f) Conducting criminal background checks or
verifying that

23 criminal background checks have been conducted for
any individual

24 provider who has not been referred to a functionally
disabled

25 person by the home care quality authority authorized
under this

26 act.

27 (2) The area agency on aging case manager shall work
with each

28 consumer to develop a plan of care under this section
that

29 identifies and ensures coordination of health and
long-term care

30 services that meet the consumer's needs. In developing
the plan,

31 they shall utilize, and modify as needed, any
comprehensive

32 community service plan developed by the department as
provided in

33 RCW 74.39A.040. The plan of care shall include, at a
minimum:

34 (a) The name and telephone number of the consumer's
area agency

35 on aging case manager, and a statement as to how the case
manager

36 can be contacted about any concerns related to the
consumer's well-

37 being or the adequacy of care provided;

p. 9 HB
1576

_1 (b) The name and telephone numbers of the consumer's
primary

_2 health care provider, and other health or long-term care
providers

_3 with whom the consumer has frequent contacts;

_4 (c) A clear description of the roles and
responsibilities of

_5 the area agency on aging case manager and the consumer
receiving

_6 services under this section;

_7 (d) The duties and tasks to be performed by the area
agency on

_8 aging case manager and the consumer receiving services
under this

_9 section;

10 (e) The type of in-home services authorized, and the
number of

11 hours of services to be provided;

12 (f) The terms of compensation of the individual
provider;

13 (g) A statement that the individual provider has the
ability

14 and willingness to carry out his or her responsibilities
relative

15 to the plan of care; and

16 (h)(i) Except as provided in (h)(ii) of this
subsection, a

17 clear statement indicating that a consumer receiving
services

18 under this section has the right to waive any of the
case

19 management services offered by the area agency on aging
under this

20 section, and a clear indication of whether the consumer
has, in

21 fact, waived any of these services.

22 (ii) The consumer's right to waive case management
services

23 does not include the right to waive reassessment or

24 reauthorization of services, or verification that
services are

25 being provided in accordance with the plan of care.

26 (3) Each area agency on aging shall retain a record
of each

27 waiver of services included in a plan of care under this
section.

28 (4) Each consumer has the right to direct and
participate in

29 the development of their plan of care to the maximum
practicable

30 extent of their abilities and desires, and to be
provided with the

31 time and support necessary to facilitate that
participation.

32 (5) A copy of the plan of care must be distributed
to the

33 consumer's primary care provider, individual provider,
and other

34 relevant providers with whom the consumer has frequent
contact, as

35 authorized by the consumer.

36 (6) The consumer's plan of care shall be an attachment
to the

37 contract between the department, or their designee, and
the

38 individual provider.

HB 1576 p. 10

_1 (7) If the department or area agency on aging case
manager

_2 finds that an individual provider's inadequate
performance or

_3 inability to deliver quality care is jeopardizing the
health,

_4 safety, or well-being of a consumer receiving service
under this

_5 section, the department or the area agency on aging may
take

_6 action to terminate the contract between the department
and the

_7 individual provider. If the department or the area
agency on aging

_8 has a reasonable, good faith belief that the health,
safety, or

_9 well-being of a consumer is in imminent jeopardy, the
department

10 or area agency on aging may summarily suspend the
contract pending

11 a fair hearing. The consumer may request a fair hearing
to contest

12 the planned action of the case manager, as provided in
chapter

13 34.05 RCW. When the department or area agency on
aging terminates

14 or summarily suspends a contract under this
subsection, they shall

15 provide oral and written notice of the action taken
to the home

16 care quality authority authorized under this act.
The department

17 may by rule adopt guidelines for implementing this
subsection.

18 (8) The department or area agency on aging may
reject a request

19 by a consumer receiving services under this section to
have a

20 family member or other person serve as his or her
individual

21 provider if the case manager has a reasonable, good
faith belief

22 that the family member or other person will be unable to

23 appropriately meet the care needs of the consumer. The
consumer may

24 request a fair hearing to contest the decision of the case

25 manager, as provided in chapter 34.05 RCW. The
department may by

26 rule adopt guidelines for implementing this subsection.

27 Sec. 9. RCW
70.127.040 and 1993 c 42 s 2 are each amended to read

28 as follows:

29 The following are not subject to regulation for the
purposes of

30 this chapter:

31 (1) A family member;

32 (2) An organization that provides only meal services
in a

33 person's residence;

34 (3) Entities furnishing durable medical equipment
that does not

35 involve the delivery of professional services beyond
those

36 necessary to set up and monitor the proper functioning
of the

37 equipment and educate the user on its proper use;

p. 11 HB
1576

_1 (4) A person who provides services through a
contract with a

_2 licensed agency;

_3 (5) An employee or volunteer of a licensed agency
who provides

_4 services only as an employee or volunteer;

_5 (6) Facilities and institutions, including but not
limited to

_6 nursing homes under chapter 18.51 RCW, hospitals under
chapter

_7 70.41 RCW, boarding homes under chapter 18.20 RCW,
developmental

_8 disability residential programs under chapter 71.12 RCW,
or other

_9 facilities and institutions, only when providing
services to

10 persons residing within the facility or institution if
the

11 delivery of the services is regulated by the state;

12 (7) Persons providing care to disabled persons
through a

13 contract with the department of social and health
services;

14 (8) The home care quality authority authorized
under section 2

15 of this act;

16 (9) Nursing homes, hospitals, or other
institutions, agencies,

17 organizations, or persons that contract with licensed
home health,

18 hospice, or home care agencies for the delivery of
services;

19 (((9))) (10) In-home assessments of an
ill, disabled, or infirm

20 person's ability to adapt to the home environment that
does not

21 result in regular ongoing care at home;

22 (((10))) (11) Services conducted by
and for the adherents of a

23 church or religious denomination that rely upon
spiritual means

24 alone through prayer for healing in accordance with the
tenets and

25 practices of such church or religious denomination and
the bona

26 fide religious beliefs genuinely held by such adherents;

27 (((11))) (12) A medicare-approved
dialysis center operating a

28 medicare-approved home dialysis program;

29 (((12))) (13) Case management services
which do not include the

30 direct delivery of home health, hospice, or home care
services;

31 (((13))) (14) Pharmacies licensed
under RCW 18.64.043 that

32 deliver prescription drugs and durable medical equipment
that does

33 not involve the use of professional services beyond
those

34 authorized to be performed by licensed pharmacists
pursuant to

35 chapter 18.64 RCW and those necessary to set up and
monitor the

36 proper functioning of the equipment and educate the
person on its

37 proper use.

38

HB 1576 p. 12

_1 Sec. 10. RCW
70.127.040 and 2000 c 175 s 4 are each amended to read

_2 as follows:

_3 The following are not subject to regulation for the
purposes of

_4 this chapter:

_5 (1) A family member providing home health, hospice,
or home

_6 care services;

_7 (2) A person who provides only meal services in an
individual's

_8 permanent or temporary residence;

_9 (3) An individual providing home care through a
direct

10 agreement with a recipient of care in an individual's
permanent or

11 temporary residence;

12 (4) A person furnishing or delivering home medical
supplies or

13 equipment that does not involve the provision of
services beyond

14 those necessary to deliver, set up, and monitor the
proper

15 functioning of the equipment and educate the user on its
proper

16 use;

17 (5) A person who provides services through a
contract with a

18 licensed agency;

19 (6) An employee or volunteer of a licensed agency
who provides

20 services only as an employee or volunteer;

21 (7) Facilities and institutions, including but not
limited to

22 nursing homes under chapter 18.51 RCW, hospitals under
chapter

23 70.41 RCW, adult family homes under chapter 70.128 RCW,
boarding

24 homes under chapter 18.20 RCW, developmental disability

25 residential programs under chapter 71.12 RCW, other
entities

26 licensed under chapter ((71.12)) 71A.12
RCW, or other licensed

27 facilities and institutions, only when providing
services to

28 persons residing within the facility or institution;

29 (8) Local and combined city-county health
departments providing

30 services under chapters 70.05 and 70.08 RCW;

31 (9) An individual providing care to ill, disabled,
infirm, or

32 vulnerable individuals through a contract with the
department of

33 social and health services;

34 (10) The home care quality authority authorized
under section 2

35 of this act;

36 (11) Nursing homes, hospitals, or other
institutions, agencies,

37 organizations, or persons that contract with licensed
home health,

38 hospice, or home care agencies for the delivery of
services;

p. 13 HB
1576

_1 (((11))) (12) In-home assessments of
an ill, disabled,

_2 vulnerable, or infirm individual that does not result in
regular

_3 ongoing care at home;

_4 (((12))) (13) Services conducted by
and for the adherents of a

_5 church or religious denomination that rely upon
spiritual means

_6 alone through prayer for healing in accordance with the
tenets and

_7 practices of such church or religious denomination and
the bona

_8 fide religious beliefs genuinely held by such adherents;

_9 (((13))) (14) A medicare-approved
dialysis center operating a

10 medicare-approved home dialysis program;

11 (((14))) (15) A person providing case
management services. For

12 the purposes of this subsection, "case
management" means the

13 assessment, coordination, authorization, planning,
training, and

14 monitoring of home health, hospice, and home care, and
does not

15 include the direct provision of care to an individual;

16 (((15))) (16) Pharmacies licensed
under RCW 18.64.043 that

17 deliver prescription drugs and durable medical equipment
that does

18 not involve the use of professional services beyond
those

19 authorized to be performed by licensed pharmacists
pursuant to

20 chapter 18.64 RCW and those necessary to set up and
monitor the

21 proper functioning of the equipment and educate the
person on its

22 proper use;

23 (((16))) (17) A volunteer hospice
complying with the

24 requirements of RCW 70.127.050; and

25 (((17))) (18) A person who provides
home care services without

26 compensation.

27 Sec. 11. RCW
70.127.060 and 1988 c 245 s 7 are each amended to read

28 as follows:

29 Except as exempt under RCW 70.127.040 (6) and (((8)))
(9) a

30 nursing home licensed under chapter 18.51 RCW is not
exempt from

31 the requirements of this chapter when the nursing home
is

32 functioning as a home health, hospice, or home care
agency.

33 Sec. 12. RCW
70.127.070 and 1988 c 245 s 8 are each amended to read

34 as follows:

35 Except as exempt under RCW 70.127.040 (6) and (((8)))
(9), a

HB 1576 p. 14

_1 hospital licensed under chapter 70.41 RCW is not exempt
from the

_2 requirements of this chapter when the hospital is
functioning as a

_3 home health, hospice, or home care agency.

_4 NEW SECTION. Sec. 13. Sections 2 through 6
of this act are each

_5 added to chapter 74.39A RCW.

_6 NEW SECTION. Sec. 14. Sections 9, 11, and
12 of this act expire

_7 January 1, 2002.

_8 NEW SECTION. Sec. 15. Section 10 of this
act takes effect

_9 January 1, 2002.

10 NEW SECTION. Sec. 16. Captions used in
this act are not any part

11 of the law.

‑‑‑ END ‑‑‑

p. 15 HB
1576