BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF
WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec.
1. The purpose of this act
is to respond to State v. Thomas, ... Wn. App. ... (Cause No.
24962-6-II, December 21, 2000), by reenacting, without substantive changes, the
Washington laws relating to criminal profiteering, and the sentencing level
ranking for criminal profiteering crimes as they existed prior to December 21,
2000.

Sec. 2. RCW 9A.82.001 and 1985 c
455 s 1 are each reenacted to read as follows:

This chapter shall be
known as the criminal profiteering act.

Sec. 3. RCW 9A.82.010 and 1999 c
143 s 40, 1995 c 285 s 34, 1995 c 92 s 5, 1994 c 218 s 17, 1992 c 210 s 6, 1992
c 145 s 13, 1989 c 20 s 17, 1988 c 33 s 5, 1986 c 78 s 1, 1985 c 455 s 2, and
1984 c 270 s 1 are each reenacted and amended to read as follows:

Unless the context
requires the contrary, the definitions in this section apply throughout this
chapter.

(1)(a) "Beneficial
interest" means:

(i) The interest of a
person as a beneficiary under a trust established under Title 11 RCW in which
the trustee for the trust holds legal or record title to real property;

(ii) The interest of a
person as a beneficiary under any other trust arrangement under which a trustee
holds legal or record title to real property for the benefit of the
beneficiary; or

(iii) The interest of a
person under any other form of express fiduciary arrangement under which one
person holds legal or record title to real property for the benefit of the
other person.

(b) "Beneficial
interest" does not include the interest of a stockholder in a corporation
or the interest of a partner in a general partnership or limited partnership.

(c) A beneficial
interest is considered to be located where the real property owned by the
trustee is located.

(2) "Control"
means the possession of a sufficient interest to permit substantial direction
over the affairs of an enterprise.

(3)
"Creditor" means a person making an extension of credit or a person
claiming by, under, or through a person making an extension of credit.

(4) "Criminal
profiteering" means any act, including any anticipatory or completed
offense, committed for financial gain, that is chargeable or indictable under
the laws of the state in which the act occurred and, if the act occurred in a
state other than this state, would be chargeable or indictable under the laws
of this state had the act occurred in this state and punishable as a felony and
by imprisonment for more than one year, regardless of whether the act is
charged or indicted, as any of the following:

(a) Murder, as defined
in RCW 9A.32.030 and 9A.32.050;

(b) Robbery, as defined
in RCW 9A.56.200 and 9A.56.210;

(c) Kidnapping, as
defined in RCW 9A.40.020 and 9A.40.030;

(d) Forgery, as defined
in RCW 9A.60.020 and 9A.60.030;

(e) Theft, as defined
in RCW 9A.56.030, 9A.56.040, 9A.56.060, and 9A.56.080;

(f) Unlawful sale of
subscription television services, as defined in RCW 9A.56.230;

(g) Theft of
telecommunication services or unlawful manufacture of a telecommunication
device, as defined in RCW 9A.56.262 and 9A.56.264;

(h) Child selling or
child buying, as defined in RCW 9A.64.030;

(i) Bribery, as defined
in RCW 9A.68.010, 9A.68.020, 9A.68.040, and 9A.68.050;

(j) Gambling, as
defined in RCW 9.46.220 and 9.46.215 and 9.46.217;

(k) Extortion, as
defined in RCW 9A.56.120 and 9A.56.130;

(l) Extortionate
extension of credit, as defined in RCW 9A.82.020 (as reenacted by this act);

(m) Advancing money for
use in an extortionate extension of credit, as defined in RCW 9A.82.030 (as
reenacted by this act);

(n) Collection of an
extortionate extension of credit, as defined in RCW 9A.82.040 (as reenacted
by this act);

(o) Collection of an
unlawful debt, as defined in RCW 9A.82.045 (as reenacted by this act);

(p) Delivery or
manufacture of controlled substances or possession with intent to deliver or
manufacture controlled substances under chapter 69.50 RCW;

(q) Trafficking in
stolen property, as defined in RCW 9A.82.050 (as reenacted by this act);

(r) Leading organized
crime, as defined in RCW 9A.82.060 (as reenacted by this act);

(s) Money laundering,
as defined in RCW 9A.83.020;

(t) Obstructing
criminal investigations or prosecutions in violation of RCW 9A.72.090,
9A.72.100, 9A.72.110, 9A.72.120, 9A.72.130, 9A.76.070, or 9A.76.180;

(u) Fraud in the
purchase or sale of securities, as defined in RCW 21.20.010;

(v) Promoting
pornography, as defined in RCW 9.68.140;

(w) Sexual exploitation
of children, as defined in RCW 9.68A.040, 9.68A.050, and 9.68A.060;

(x) Promoting
prostitution, as defined in RCW 9A.88.070 and 9A.88.080;

(y) Arson, as defined
in RCW 9A.48.020 and 9A.48.030;

(z) Assault, as defined
in RCW 9A.36.011 and 9A.36.021;

(aa) Assault of a
child, as defined in RCW 9A.36.120 and 9A.36.130;

(bb) A pattern of
equity skimming, as defined in RCW 61.34.020;

(cc) Commercial
telephone solicitation in violation of RCW 19.158.040(1);

(dd) Trafficking in
insurance claims, as defined in RCW 48.30A.015;

(ee) Unlawful practice
of law, as defined in RCW 2.48.180;

(ff) Commercial
bribery, as defined in RCW 9A.68.060;

(gg) Health care false
claims, as defined in RCW 48.80.030; or

(hh) Unlicensed
practice of a profession or business, as defined in RCW 18.130.190(7).

(5) "Dealer in
property" means a person who buys and sells property as a business.

(6) "Debtor"
means a person to whom an extension of credit is made or a person who
guarantees the repayment of an extension of credit or in any manner undertakes
to indemnify the creditor against loss resulting from the failure of a person
to whom an extension is made to repay the same.

(7) "Documentary
material" means any book, paper, document, writing, drawing, graph, chart,
photograph, phonograph record, magnetic tape, computer printout, other data
compilation from which information can be obtained or from which information
can be translated into usable form, or other tangible item.

(8)
"Enterprise" includes any individual, sole proprietorship,
partnership, corporation, business trust, or other profit or nonprofit legal
entity, and includes any union, association, or group of individuals associated
in fact although not a legal entity, and both illicit and licit enterprises and
governmental and nongovernmental entities.

(9) "Extortionate
extension of credit" means an extension of credit with respect to which it
is the understanding of the creditor and the debtor at the time the extension
is made that delay in making repayment or failure to make repayment could
result in the use of violence or other criminal means to cause harm to the
person, reputation, or property of any person.

(10) "Extortionate
means" means the use, or an express or implicit threat of use, of violence
or other criminal means to cause harm to the person, reputation, or property of
any person.

(11) "Financial
institution" means any bank, trust company, savings and loan association,
savings bank, mutual savings bank, credit union, or loan company under the
jurisdiction of the state or an agency of the United States.

(12) "Pattern of
criminal profiteering activity" means engaging in at least three acts of
criminal profiteering, one of which occurred after July 1, 1985, and the last
of which occurred within five years, excluding any period of imprisonment,
after the commission of the earliest act of criminal profiteering. In order to
constitute a pattern, the three acts must have the same or similar intent,
results, accomplices, principals, victims, or methods of commission, or be
otherwise interrelated by distinguishing characteristics including a nexus to
the same enterprise, and must not be isolated events. However, in any civil
proceedings brought pursuant to RCW 9A.82.100 (as reenacted by this act)
by any person other than the attorney general or county prosecuting attorney in
which one or more acts of fraud in the purchase or sale of securities are
asserted as acts of criminal profiteering activity, it is a condition to civil
liability under RCW 9A.82.100 (as reenacted by this act) that the
defendant has been convicted in a criminal proceeding of fraud in the purchase
or sale of securities under RCW 21.20.400 or under the laws of another state or
of the United States requiring the same elements of proof, but such conviction
need not relate to any act or acts asserted as acts of criminal profiteering
activity in such civil action under RCW 9A.82.100 (as reenacted by this act).

(13) "Real
property" means any real property or interest in real property, including
but not limited to a land sale contract, lease, or mortgage of real property.

(14)
"Records" means any book, paper, writing, record, computer program,
or other material.

(15) "Repayment of
an extension of credit" means the repayment, satisfaction, or discharge in
whole or in part of a debt or claim, acknowledged or disputed, valid or invalid,
resulting from or in connection with that extension of credit.

(16) "Stolen
property" means property that has been obtained by theft, robbery, or
extortion.

(17) "To collect
an extension of credit" means to induce in any way a person to make repayment
thereof.

(18) "To extend
credit" means to make or renew a loan or to enter into an agreement, tacit
or express, whereby the repayment or satisfaction of a debt or claim, whether
acknowledged or disputed, valid or invalid, and however arising, may or shall
be deferred.

(19)
"Traffic" means to sell, transfer, distribute, dispense, or otherwise
dispose of stolen property to another person, or to buy, receive, possess, or
obtain control of stolen property, with intent to sell, transfer, distribute,
dispense, or otherwise dispose of the property to another person.

(20)(a)
"Trustee" means:

(i) A person acting as
a trustee under a trust established under Title 11 RCW in which the trustee
holds legal or record title to real property;

(ii) A person who holds
legal or record title to real property in which another person has a beneficial
interest; or

(iii) A successor
trustee to a person who is a trustee under (a)(i) or (ii) of this subsection.

(b) "Trustee"
does not mean a person appointed or acting as:

(i) A personal
representative under Title 11 RCW;

(ii) A trustee of any
testamentary trust;

(iii) A trustee of any
indenture of trust under which a bond is issued; or

(iv) A trustee under a
deed of trust.

(21) "Unlawful
debt" means any money or other thing of value constituting principal or
interest of a debt that is legally unenforceable in the state in full or in
part because the debt was incurred or contracted:

(a) In violation of any
one of the following:

(i) Chapter 67.16 RCW
relating to horse racing;

(ii) Chapter 9.46 RCW
relating to gambling;

(b) In a gambling
activity in violation of federal law; or

(c) In connection with
the business of lending money or a thing of value at a rate that is at least
twice the permitted rate under the applicable state or federal law relating to
usury.

Sec. 4. RCW 9A.82.020 and 1985 c
455 s 3 and 1984 c 270 s 2 are each reenacted to read as follows:

(1) A person who
knowingly makes an extortionate extension of credit is guilty of a class B
felony.

(2) In a prosecution
under this section, if it is shown that all of the following factors are
present in connection with the extension of credit, there is prima facie
evidence that the extension of credit was extortionate:

(a) The repayment of
the extension of credit, or the performance of any promise given in
consideration thereof, would be unenforceable at the time the extension of
credit was made through civil judicial processes against the debtor in the
county in which the debtor, if a natural person, resided or in every county in
which the debtor, if other than a natural person, was incorporated or qualified
to do business.

(b) The extension of
credit was made at a rate of interest in excess of an annual rate of forty-five
percent calculated according to the actuarial method of allocating payments
made on a debt between principal and interest, pursuant to which a payment is
applied first to the accumulated interest and the balance is applied to the
unpaid principal.

(c) The creditor
intended the debtor to believe that failure to comply with the terms of the
extension of credit would be enforced by extortionate means.

(d) Upon the making of
the extension of credit, the total of the extensions of credit by the creditor
to the debtor then outstanding, including any unpaid interest or similar
charges, exceeded one hundred dollars.

Sec. 5. RCW 9A.82.030 and 1985 c
455 s 4 and 1984 c 270 s 3 are each reenacted to read as follows:

A person who advances
money or property, whether as a gift, loan, investment, or pursuant to a
partnership or profit-sharing agreement or otherwise, to any person, with the
knowledge that it is the intention of that person to use the money or property
so advanced, directly or indirectly, for the purpose of making extortionate
extensions of credit, is guilty of a class B felony.

Sec. 6. RCW 9A.82.040 and 1985 c
455 s 5 and 1984 c 270 s 4 are each reenacted to read as follows:

A person who knowingly
participates in any way in the use of any extortionate means to collect or
attempt to collect any extensions of credit or to punish any person for the
nonrepayment thereof, is guilty of a class B felony.

Sec. 7. RCW 9A.82.045 and 1985 c
455 s 6 are each reenacted to read as follows:

It is unlawful for any
person knowingly to collect any unlawful debt. A violation of this section is
a class C felony.

Sec. 8. RCW 9A.82.050 and 1984 c
270 s 5 are each reenacted to read as follows:

(1) A person who
recklessly traffics in stolen property is guilty of trafficking in stolen
property in the second degree.

(2) A person who
knowingly initiates, organizes, plans, finances, directs, manages, or
supervises the theft of property for sale to others, or who knowingly traffics
in stolen property, is guilty of trafficking in stolen property in the first
degree.

(3) Trafficking in
stolen property in the second degree is a class C felony. Trafficking in
stolen property in the first degree is a class B felony.

Sec. 9. RCW 9A.82.060 and 1985 c
455 s 7 and 1984 c 270 s 6 are each reenacted to read as follows:

(1) A person commits
the offense of leading organized crime by:

(a) Intentionally
organizing, managing, directing, supervising, or financing any three or more
persons with the intent to engage in a pattern of criminal profiteering
activity; or

(b) Intentionally
inciting or inducing others to engage in violence or intimidation with the
intent to further or promote the accomplishment of a pattern of criminal
profiteering activity.

(2) Leading organized
crime as defined in subsection (1)(a) of this section is a class A felony, and
as defined in subsection (1)(b) of this section is a class B felony.

Sec. 10. RCW 9A.82.070 and 1984 c
270 s 7 are each reenacted to read as follows:

Whoever knowingly
gives, promises, or offers to any professional or amateur baseball, football,
hockey, polo, tennis, horse race, or basketball player or boxer or any player
or referee or other official who participates or expects to participate in any
professional or amateur game or sport, or to any manager, coach, or trainer of
any team or participant or prospective participant in any such game, contest,
or sport, any benefit with intent to influence the person to lose or try to
lose or cause to be lost or to limit the person's or person's team's margin of
victory or defeat, or in the case of a referee or other official to affect the
decisions or the performance of the official's duties in any way, in a
baseball, football, hockey, or basketball game, boxing, tennis, horse race, or
polo match, or any professional or amateur sport or game, in which the player
or participant or referee or other official is taking part or expects to take
part, or has any duty or connection therewith, is guilty of a class C felony.

Sec. 11. RCW 9A.82.080 and 1985 c
455 s 8 and 1984 c 270 s 8 are each reenacted to read as follows:

(1) It is unlawful for
a person who has knowingly received any of the proceeds derived, directly or
indirectly, from a pattern of criminal profiteering activity to use or invest,
whether directly or indirectly, any part of the proceeds, or the proceeds
derived from the investment or use thereof, in the acquisition of any title to,
or any right, interest, or equity in, real property or in the establishment or
operation of any enterprise.

(2) It is unlawful for
a person knowingly to acquire or maintain, directly or indirectly, any interest
in or control of any enterprise or real property through a pattern of criminal
profiteering activity.

(3) It is unlawful for
a person knowingly to conspire or attempt to violate subsection (1) or (2) of
this section.

(4) A violation of
subsection (1) or (2) of this section is a class B felony. A violation of
subsection (3) of this section is a class C felony.

Sec. 12. RCW 9A.82.085 and 1985 c
455 s 9 are each reenacted and amended to read as follows:

In a criminal
prosecution alleging a violation of RCW 9A.82.060 or 9A.82.080 (as reenacted
by this act), the state is barred from joining any offense other than the
offenses alleged to be part of the pattern of criminal profiteering activity.
When a defendant has been tried criminally for a violation of RCW 9A.82.060 or
9A.82.080 (as reenacted by this act), the state is barred from
subsequently charging the defendant with an offense that was alleged to be part
of the pattern of criminal profiteering activity for which he or she was tried.

Sec. 13. RCW 9A.82.090 and 1985 c
455 s 10 and 1984 c 270 s 9 are each reenacted and amended to read as follows:

During the pendency of
any criminal case charging a violation of RCW 9A.82.060 (as reenacted by
this act) or a violation of RCW 9A.82.080 (as reenacted by this act),
the superior court may, in addition to its other powers, issue an order
pursuant to RCW 9A.82.100 (2) or (3) (as reenacted by this act). Upon
conviction of a person for a violation of RCW 9A.82.060 (as reenacted by
this act) or a violation of RCW 9A.82.080 (as reenacted by this act),
the superior court may, in addition to its other powers of disposition, issue
an order pursuant to RCW 9A.82.100 (as reenacted by this act).

Sec. 14. RCW 9A.82.100 and 1989 c
271 s 111, 1985 c 455 s 11, and 1984 c 270 s 10 are each reenacted and amended
to read as follows:

(1)(a) A person who
sustains injury to his or her person, business, or property by an act of
criminal profiteering that is part of a pattern of criminal profiteering
activity or by a violation of RCW 9A.82.060 or 9A.82.080 (as reenacted by
this act) may file an action in superior court for the recovery of damages
and the costs of the suit, including reasonable investigative and attorney's
fees.

(b) The attorney
general or county prosecuting attorney may file an action: (i) On behalf of
those persons injured or, respectively, on behalf of the state or county if the
entity has sustained damages, or (ii) to prevent, restrain, or remedy a pattern
of criminal profiteering activity or a violation of RCW 9A.82.060 or 9A.82.080 (as
reenacted by this act).

(c) An action for
damages filed by or on behalf of an injured person, the state, or the county
shall be for the recovery of damages and the costs of the suit, including
reasonable investigative and attorney's fees.

(d) In an action filed
to prevent, restrain, or remedy a pattern of criminal profiteering activity or
a violation of RCW 9A.82.060 or 9A.82.080 (as reenacted by this act),
the court, upon proof of the violation, may impose a civil penalty not
exceeding two hundred fifty thousand dollars, in addition to awarding the cost
of the suit, including reasonable investigative and attorney's fees.

(2) The superior court
has jurisdiction to prevent, restrain, and remedy a pattern of criminal
profiteering or a violation of RCW 9A.82.060 or 9A.82.080 (as reenacted by
this act) after making provision for the rights of all innocent persons
affected by the violation and after hearing or trial, as appropriate, by
issuing appropriate orders.

(3) Prior to a
determination of liability, orders issued under subsection (2) of this section
may include, but are not limited to, entering restraining orders or
prohibitions or taking such other actions, including the acceptance of
satisfactory performance bonds, in connection with any property or other
interest subject to damages, forfeiture, or other restraints pursuant to this
section as the court deems proper. The orders may also include attachment,
receivership, or injunctive relief in regard to personal or real property pursuant
to Title 7 RCW. In shaping the reach or scope of receivership, attachment, or
injunctive relief, the superior court shall provide for the protection of bona
fide interests in property, including community property, of persons who were
not involved in the violation of this chapter, except to the extent that such
interests or property were acquired or used in such a way as to be subject to
forfeiture under RCW 9A.82.100(4)(f) (as reenacted by this act).

(4) Following a
determination of liability, orders may include, but are not limited to:

(a) Ordering any person
to divest himself or herself of any interest, direct or indirect, in any
enterprise.

(b) Imposing reasonable
restrictions on the future activities or investments of any person, including
prohibiting any person from engaging in the same type of endeavor as the
enterprise engaged in, the activities of which affect the laws of this state,
to the extent the Constitutions of the United States and this state permit.

(c) Ordering
dissolution or reorganization of any enterprise.

(d) Ordering the
payment of actual damages sustained to those persons injured by a violation of
RCW 9A.82.060 or 9A.82.080 (as reenacted by this act) or an act of
criminal profiteering that is part of a pattern of criminal profiteering, and
in the court's discretion, increasing the payment to an amount not exceeding
three times the actual damages sustained.

(e) Ordering the
payment of all costs and expenses of the prosecution and investigation of a
pattern of criminal profiteering activity or a violation of RCW 9A.82.060 or
9A.82.080 (as reenacted by this act), civil and criminal, incurred by
the state or county, including any costs of defense provided at public expense,
as appropriate to the state general fund or the antiprofiteering revolving fund
of the county.

(f) Ordering forfeiture
first as restitution to any person damaged by an act of criminal profiteering
that is part of a pattern of criminal profiteering then to the state general
fund or antiprofiteering revolving fund of the county, as appropriate, to the
extent not already ordered to be paid in other damages, of the following:

(i) Any property or
other interest acquired or maintained in violation of RCW 9A.82.060 or
9A.82.080 (as reenacted by this act) to the extent of the investment of
funds, and any appreciation or income attributable to the investment, from a
violation of RCW 9A.82.060 or 9A.82.080 (as reenacted by this act).

(ii) Any property,
contractual right, or claim against property used to influence any enterprise
that a person has established, operated, controlled, conducted, or participated
in the conduct of, in violation of RCW 9A.82.060 or 9A.82.080 (as reenacted
by this act).

(iii) All proceeds
traceable to or derived from an offense included in the pattern of criminal
profiteering activity and all moneys, negotiable instruments, securities, and
other things of value significantly used or intended to be used significantly
to facilitate commission of the offense.

(g) Ordering payment to
the state general fund or antiprofiteering revolving fund of the county, as
appropriate, of an amount equal to the gain a person has acquired or maintained
through an offense included in the definition of criminal profiteering.

(5) In addition to or
in lieu of an action under this section, the attorney general or county
prosecuting attorney may file an action for forfeiture to the state general
fund or antiprofiteering revolving fund of the county, as appropriate, to the
extent not already ordered paid pursuant to this section, of the following:

(a) Any interest
acquired or maintained by a person in violation of RCW 9A.82.060 or 9A.82.080 (as
reenacted by this act) to the extent of the investment of funds obtained
from a violation of RCW 9A.82.060 or 9A.82.080 (as reenacted by this act)
and any appreciation or income attributable to the investment.

(b) Any property,
contractual right, or claim against property used to influence any enterprise
that a person has established, operated, controlled, conducted, or participated
in the conduct of, in violation of RCW 9A.82.060 or 9A.82.080 (as reenacted
by this act).

(c) All proceeds
traceable to or derived from an offense included in the pattern of criminal
profiteering activity and all moneys, negotiable instruments, securities, and
other things of value significantly used or intended to be used significantly
to facilitate the commission of the offense.

(6) A defendant
convicted in any criminal proceeding is precluded in any civil proceeding from
denying the essential allegations of the criminal offense proven in the
criminal trial in which the defendant was convicted. For the purposes of this
subsection, a conviction shall be deemed to have occurred upon a verdict,
finding, or plea of guilty, notwithstanding the fact that appellate review of
the conviction and sentence has been or may be sought. If a subsequent
reversal of the conviction occurs, any judgment that was based upon that conviction
may be reopened upon motion of the defendant.

(7) The initiation of
civil proceedings under this section shall be commenced within three years
after discovery of the pattern of criminal profiteering activity or after the
pattern should reasonably have been discovered.

(8) The attorney
general or county prosecuting attorney may, in a civil action brought pursuant
to this section, file with the clerk of the superior court a certificate
stating that the case is of special public importance. A copy of that
certificate shall be furnished immediately by the clerk to the presiding chief
judge of the superior court in which the action is pending and, upon receipt of
the copy, the judge shall immediately designate a judge to hear and determine
the action. The judge so designated shall promptly assign the action for
hearing, participate in the hearings and determination, and cause the action to
be expedited.

(9) The standard of
proof in actions brought pursuant to this section is the preponderance of the
evidence test.

(10) A person other
than the attorney general or county prosecuting attorney who files an action
under this section shall serve notice and one copy of the pleading on the
attorney general within thirty days after the action is filed with the superior
court. The notice shall identify the action, the person, and the person's
attorney. Service of the notice does not limit or otherwise affect the right
of the state to maintain an action under this section or intervene in a pending
action nor does it authorize the person to name the state or the attorney
general as a party to the action.

(11) Except in cases
filed by a county prosecuting attorney, the attorney general may, upon timely
application, intervene in any civil action or proceeding brought under this
section if the attorney general certifies that in the attorney general's
opinion the action is of special public importance. Upon intervention, the
attorney general may assert any available claim and is entitled to the same
relief as if the attorney general had instituted a separate action.

(12) In addition to the
attorney general's right to intervene as a party in any action under this
section, the attorney general may appear as amicus curiae in any proceeding in
which a claim under this section has been asserted or in which a court is
interpreting RCW 9A.82.010, 9A.82.080, 9A.82.090, 9A.82.110, or 9A.82.120 (as
reenacted by this act), or this section.

(13) A private civil
action under this section does not limit any other civil or criminal action
under this chapter or any other provision. Private civil remedies provided
under this section are supplemental and not mutually exclusive.

(14) Upon motion by the
defendant, the court may authorize the sale or transfer of assets subject to an
order or lien authorized by this chapter for the purpose of paying actual
attorney's fees and costs of defense. The motion shall specify the assets for
which sale or transfer is sought and shall be accompanied by the defendant's
sworn statement that the defendant has no other assets available for such
purposes. No order authorizing such sale or transfer may be entered unless the
court finds that the assets involved are not subject to possible forfeiture
under RCW 9A.82.100(4)(f) (as reenacted by this act). Prior to
disposition of the motion, the court shall notify the state of the assets
sought to be sold or transferred and shall hear argument on the issue of
whether the assets are subject to forfeiture under RCW 9A.82.100(4)(f) (as
reenacted by this act). Such a motion may be made from time to time and
shall be heard by the court on an expedited basis.

(15) In an action
brought under subsection (1)(a) and (b)(i) of this section, either party has
the right to a jury trial.

Sec. 15. RCW 9A.82.110 and 1985 c
455 s 12 and 1984 c 270 s 11 are each reenacted and amended to read as follows:

(1) Any payments or
forfeiture to the state general fund ordered under RCW 9A.82.100 (4) or (5) (as
reenacted by this act) shall be deposited in the public safety and
education account.

(2) In an action
brought by the attorney general on behalf of the state under RCW
9A.82.100(1)(b)(i) (as reenacted by this act) in which the state
prevails, any payments ordered in excess of the actual damages sustained shall
be deposited in the public safety and education account.

(3) It is the intent of
the legislature that the money deposited in the public safety and education
account pursuant to this chapter be appropriated to promote crime victims'
compensation.

(4)(a) The county
legislative authority may establish an antiprofiteering revolving fund to be
administered by the county prosecuting attorney under the conditions and for
the purposes provided by this subsection. Disbursements from the fund shall be
on authorization of the county prosecuting attorney. No appropriation is
required for disbursements.

(b) Any prosecution and
investigation costs, including attorney's fees, recovered for the state by the
county prosecuting attorney as a result of enforcement of civil and criminal
statutes pertaining to any offense included in the definition of criminal
profiteering, whether by final judgment, settlement, or otherwise, shall be
deposited, as directed by a court of competent jurisdiction, in the fund established
by this subsection. In an action brought by a prosecuting attorney on behalf
of the county under RCW 9A.82.100(1)(b)(i) (as reenacted by this act) in
which the county prevails, any payments ordered in excess of the actual damages
sustained shall be deposited in the public safety and education account in the
state general fund.

(c) The county
legislative authority may prescribe a maximum level of moneys in the
antiprofiteering revolving fund. Moneys exceeding the prescribed maximum shall
be transferred to the county current expense fund.

(d) The moneys in the
fund shall be used by the county prosecuting attorney for the investigation and
prosecution of any offense, within the jurisdiction of the county prosecuting
attorney, included in the definition of criminal profiteering, including civil
enforcement.

(e) If a county has not
established an antiprofiteering revolving fund, any payments or forfeitures
ordered to the county under this chapter shall be deposited to the county
current expense fund.

Sec. 16. RCW 9A.82.120 and 1985 c
455 s 13 and 1984 c 270 s 12 are each reenacted and amended to read as follows:

(1) The state, upon
filing a criminal action under RCW 9A.82.060 or 9A.82.080 (as reenacted by
this act) or a civil action under RCW 9A.82.100 (as reenacted by this
act), may file in accordance with this section a criminal profiteering
lien. A filing fee or other charge is not required for filing a criminal
profiteering lien.

(2) A criminal
profiteering lien shall be signed by the attorney general or the county
prosecuting attorney representing the state in the action and shall set forth
the following information:

(a) The name of the
defendant whose property or other interests are to be subject to the lien;

(b) In the discretion
of the attorney general or county prosecuting attorney filing the lien, any
aliases or fictitious names of the defendant named in the lien;

(c) If known to the
attorney general or county prosecuting attorney filing the lien, the present
residence or principal place of business of the person named in the lien;

(d) A reference to the
proceeding pursuant to which the lien is filed, including the name of the
court, the title of the action, and the court's file number for the proceeding;

(e) The name and
address of the attorney representing the state in the proceeding pursuant to
which the lien is filed;

(f) A statement that
the notice is being filed pursuant to this section;

(g) The amount that the
state claims in the action or, with respect to property or other interests that
the state has requested forfeiture to the state or county, a description of the
property or interests sought to be paid or forfeited;

(h) If known to the
attorney general or county prosecuting attorney filing the lien, a description
of property that is subject to forfeiture to the state or property in which the
defendant has an interest that is available to satisfy a judgment entered in
favor of the state; and

(i) Such other
information as the attorney general or county prosecuting attorney filing the
lien deems appropriate.

(3) The attorney
general or the county prosecuting attorney filing the lien may amend a lien
filed under this section at any time by filing an amended criminal profiteering
lien in accordance with this section that identifies the prior lien amended.

(4) The attorney
general or the county prosecuting attorney filing the lien shall, as soon as
practical after filing a criminal profiteering lien, furnish to any person
named in the lien a notice of the filing of the lien. Failure to furnish
notice under this subsection does not invalidate or otherwise affect a criminal
profiteering lien filed in accordance with this section.

(5)(a) A criminal
profiteering lien is perfected against interests in personal property in the
same manner (([as])) as a security interest in like property
pursuant to RCW 62A.9-302, 62A.9-303, 62A.9-304, 62A.9-305, and 62A.9-306 or as
otherwise required to perfect a security interest in like property under
applicable law. In the case of perfection by filing, the state shall file, in
lieu of a financing statement in the form prescribed by RCW 62A.9-402, a notice
of lien in substantially the following form:

NOTICE
OF LIEN

Pursuant to RCW
9A.82.120 (as reenacted by this act), the state of Washington claims a
criminal profiteering lien on all real and personal property of:

Name:

. . . . . . . . . . .

Address:

. . . . . . . . . . .

. . . . . . . . . . .

State
of Washington

...................................

By
(authorized signature)

On receipt of such a
notice from the state, a filing officer shall, without payment of filing fee,
file and index the notice as if it were a financing statement naming the state
as secured party and the defendant as debtor.

(b) A criminal
profiteering lien is perfected against interests in real property by filing the
lien in the office where a mortgage on the real estate would be filed or
recorded. The filing officer shall file and index the criminal profiteering
lien, without payment of a filing fee, in the same manner as a mortgage.

(6) The filing of a
criminal profiteering lien in accordance with this section creates a lien in
favor of the state in:

(a) Any interest of the
defendant, in real property situated in the county in which the lien is filed, then
maintained, or thereafter acquired in the name of the defendant identified in
the lien;

(b) Any interest of the
defendant, in personal property situated in this state, then maintained or
thereafter acquired in the name of the defendant identified in the lien; and

(c) Any property
identified in the lien to the extent of the defendant's interest therein.

(7) The lien created in
favor of the state in accordance with this section, when filed or otherwise
perfected as provided in subsection (5) of this section, has, with respect to
any of the property described in subsection (6) of this section, the same priority
determined pursuant to the laws of this state as a mortgage or security
interest given for value (but not a purchase money security interest) and
perfected in the same manner with respect to such property; except that any
lien perfected pursuant to Title 60 RCW by any person who, in the ordinary
course of his business, furnishes labor, services, or materials, or rents,
leases, or otherwise supplies equipment, without knowledge of the criminal
profiteering lien, is superior to the criminal profiteering lien.

(8) Upon entry of
judgment in favor of the state, the state may proceed to execute thereon as in
the case of any other judgment, except that in order to preserve the state's
lien priority as provided in this section the state shall, in addition to such
other notice as is required by law, give at least thirty days' notice of the
execution to any person possessing at the time the notice is given, an interest
recorded subsequent to the date the state's lien was perfected.

(9) Upon the entry of a
final judgment in favor of the state providing for forfeiture of property to
the state, the title of the state to the property:

(a) In the case of real
property or a beneficial interest in real property, relates back to the date of
filing the criminal profiteering lien or, if no criminal profiteering lien is
filed, then to the date of recording of the final judgment or the abstract
thereof; or

(b) In the case of
personal property or a beneficial interest in personal property, relates back
to the date the personal property was seized by the state, or the date of
filing of a criminal profiteering lien in accordance with this section,
whichever is earlier, but if the property was not seized and no criminal
profiteering lien was filed then to the date the final judgment was filed with
the department of licensing and, if the personal property is an aircraft, with
the federal aviation administration.

(10) This section does
not limit the right of the state to obtain any order or injunction,
receivership, writ, attachment, garnishment, or other remedy authorized under
RCW 9A.82.100 (as reenacted by this act) or appropriate to protect the
interests of the state or available under other applicable law.

(11) In a civil or
criminal action under this chapter, the superior court shall provide for the
protection of bona fide interests in property, including community property,
subject to liens of persons who were not involved in the violation of this
chapter, except to the extent that such interests or property were acquired or
used in such a way as to be subject to forfeiture pursuant to RCW
9A.82.100(4)(f) (as reenacted by this act).

Sec. 17. RCW 9A.82.130 and 1985 c
455 s 14 and 1984 c 270 s 13 are each reenacted and amended to read as follows:

(1) A trustee who is
personally served in the manner provided for service of legal process with
written notice that a lien notice has been recorded or a civil proceeding or
criminal proceeding has been instituted under this chapter against any person
for whom the trustee holds legal or record title to real property, shall
immediately furnish to the attorney general or county prosecuting attorney the
following:

(a) The name and
address of the person, as known to the trustee;

(b) To the extent known
to the trustee, the name and address of all other persons for whose benefit the
trustee holds title to the real property; and

(c) If requested by the
attorney general or county prosecuting attorney, a copy of the trust agreement
or other instrument under which the trustee holds legal or record title to the
real property.

(2) The recording of a
lien notice shall not constitute a lien on the record title to real property
owned by a trustee at the time of recording except to the extent that trustee
is named in and served with the lien notice as provided in subsection (1) of
this section. The attorney general or county prosecuting attorney may bring a
civil proceeding in superior court against the trustee to recover from the
trustee the amounts set forth in RCW 9A.82.150 (as reenacted by this act).
In addition to amounts recovered under RCW 9A.82.150 (as reenacted by this
act), the attorney general or county prosecuting attorney also may recover
its investigative costs and attorneys' fees.

(3) The recording of a
lien notice does not affect the use to which real property or a beneficial
interest owned by the person named in the lien notice may be put or the right
of the person to receive any avails, rents, or other proceeds resulting from
the use and ownership except the sale of the property, until a judgment of
forfeiture is entered.

(4) This section does
not apply to any conveyance by a trustee under a court order unless the court
order is entered in an action between the trustee and the beneficiary.

(5) Notwithstanding
that a trustee is served with notice as provided in subsection (1) of this
section, this section does not apply to a conveyance by a trustee required
under the terms of any trust agreement in effect before service of such notice
on the trustee.

Sec. 18. RCW 9A.82.140 and 1985 c
455 s 15 and 1984 c 270 s 14 are each reenacted and amended to read as follows:

(1) The term of a lien
notice shall be six years from the date the lien notice is recorded. If a
renewal lien notice is filed by the attorney general or county prosecuting
attorney, the term of the renewal lien notice shall be for six years from the
date the renewal lien notice is recorded. The attorney general or county
prosecuting attorney is entitled to only one renewal of the lien notice.

(2) The attorney
general or county prosecuting attorney filing the lien notice may release in
whole or in part any lien notice or may release any specific property or
beneficial interest from the lien notice upon such terms and conditions as the
attorney general or county prosecuting attorney considers appropriate and shall
release any lien upon the dismissal of the action which is the basis of the
lien or satisfaction of the judgment of the court in the action or other final
disposition of the claim evidenced by the lien. A release of a lien notice
executed by the attorney general or county prosecuting attorney shall be
recorded in the official records in which the lien notice covering that
property was recorded. No charge or fee may be imposed for recording any
release of a lien notice.

(3)(a) A person named
in the lien notice may move the court in which the civil proceeding giving rise
to the lien notice is pending for an order extinguishing the lien notice.

(b) Upon the motion of
a person under (a) of this subsection, the court immediately shall enter an
order setting a date for hearing, which shall be not less than five nor more
than ten days after the motion is filed. The order and a copy of the motion shall
be served on the attorney general or county prosecuting attorney within three
days after the entry of the court's order. At the hearing, the court shall
take evidence on the issue of whether any property or beneficial interest owned
by the person is covered by the lien notice or otherwise subject to forfeiture
under RCW 9A.82.120 (as reenacted by this act). If the person shows by
a preponderance of the evidence that the lien notice is not applicable to the
person or that any property or beneficial interest owned by the person is not
subject to forfeiture under RCW 9A.82.120 (as reenacted by this act),
the court shall enter a judgment extinguishing the lien notice or releasing the
property or beneficial interest from the lien notice.

(c) The court may enter
an order releasing from the lien notice any specific real property or
beneficial interest if, at the time the lien notice is recorded, there is
pending an arms length sale of the real property or beneficial interest in
which the parties are under no undue compulsion to sell or buy and are able,
willing, and reasonably well informed and the sale is for the fair market value
of the real property or beneficial interest and the recording of the lien
notice prevents the sale of the property or interest. The proceeds resulting
from the sale of the real property or beneficial interest shall be deposited
with the court, subject to the further order of the court.

(d) At any time after
filing of a lien, the court may release from the lien any property upon application
by the defendant and posting of security equal to the value of the property to
be released.

Sec. 19. RCW 9A.82.150 and 1985 c
455 s 16 and 1984 c 270 s 15 are each reenacted and amended to read as follows:

(1) If a trustee
conveys title to real property for which, at the time of the conveyance, the
trustee has been personally served with notice as provided in RCW 9A.82.130(1) (as
reenacted by this act) of a lien under this chapter, the trustee shall be
liable to the state for the greater of:

(a) The amount of
proceeds received by the person named in the lien notice as a result of the
conveyance;

(b) The amount of
proceeds received by the trustee as a result of the conveyance and distributed
by the trustee to the person named in the lien notice; or

(c) The fair market
value of the interest of the person named in the lien notice in the real
property so conveyed.

(2) If the trustee
conveys the real property for which a lien notice has been served on the
trustee at the time of the conveyance and holds the proceeds that would
otherwise be paid or distributed to the beneficiary or at the direction of the
beneficiary or beneficiary's designee, the trustee's liability shall not exceed
the amount of the proceeds so held so long as the trustee continues to hold the
proceeds.

Sec. 20. RCW 9A.82.160 and 1985 c
455 s 17 and 1984 c 270 s 16 are each reenacted and amended to read as follows:

A trustee who knowingly
fails to comply with RCW 9A.82.130(1) (as reenacted by this act) is
guilty of a gross misdemeanor. A trustee who conveys title to real property
after service of the notice as provided in RCW 9A.82.130(1) (as reenacted by
this act) with the intent to evade the provisions of RCW 9A.82.100 or 9A.82.120
(as reenacted by this act) with respect to such property is guilty of a
class C felony.

Sec. 21. RCW 9A.82.170 and 1985 c
455 s 18 and 1984 c 270 s 17 are each reenacted and amended to read as follows:

(1) Upon request of the
attorney general or prosecuting attorney, a subpoena for the production of
records of a financial institution may be signed and issued by a superior court
judge if there is reason to believe that an act of criminal profiteering or a
violation of RCW 9A.82.060 or 9A.82.080 (as reenacted by this act) has
occurred or is occurring and that the records sought will materially aid in the
investigation of such activity or appears reasonably calculated to lead to the
discovery of information that will do so. The subpoena shall be served on the
financial institution as in civil actions. The court may, upon motion timely
made and in any event before the time specified for compliance with the
subpoena, condition compliance upon advancement by the attorney general or
prosecuting attorney of the reasonable costs of producing the records specified
in the subpoena.

(2) A response to a
subpoena issued under this section is sufficient if a copy or printout, duly
authenticated by an officer of the financial institution as a true and correct
copy or printout of its records, is provided, unless otherwise provided in the
subpoena for good cause shown.

(3) Except as provided
in this subsection, a financial institution served with a subpoena under this
section shall not disclose to the customer the fact that a subpoena seeking
records relating to the customer has been served. A judge of the superior
court may order the attorney general, prosecuting attorney, or financial
institution to advise the financial institution's customer of the subpoena.
Unless ordered to do so by the court, disclosure of the subpoena by the
financial institution or any of its employees to the customer is a misdemeanor.

(((3) [(4)])) (4)
A financial institution shall be reimbursed in an amount set by the court for
reasonable costs incurred in providing information pursuant to this section.

(((4) [(5)])) (5)
This section does not preclude the use of other legally authorized means of
obtaining records, nor preclude the assertion of any legally recognized
privileges.

(((5) [(6)])) (6)
Disclosure by the attorney general, county prosecuting attorney, or any peace
officer or other person designated by the attorney general or the county
prosecuting attorney, of information obtained under this section, except in the
proper discharge of official duties, is punishable as a misdemeanor.

(((6) [(7)])) (7)
Upon filing of any civil or criminal action, the nondisclosure requirements of
any subpoena or order under this section shall terminate, and the attorney
general or prosecuting attorney filing the action shall provide to the
defendant copies of all subpoenas or other orders issued under this section.

(((7) [(8)])) (8)
A financial institution shall not be civilly liable for harm resulting from its
compliance with the provisions of this chapter.

Sec. 22. RCW 9A.82.900 and 1984 c
270 s 20 are each reenacted to read as follows:

If any provision of
this act or its application to any person or circumstance is held invalid, the
remainder of the act or the application of the provision to other persons or
circumstances is not affected.

Sec. 23. RCW 9A.82.901 and 1985 c
455 s 20 and 1984 c 270 s 21 are each reenacted to read as follows:

Sections 12, 13, 14,
15, and 16, chapter 270, Laws of 1984 as amended by sections 13, 14, 15, 16,
and 17 of this 1985 act shall take effect on July 1, 1986, and the remainder of
chapter 270, Laws of 1984 shall take effect on July 1, 1985.

Sec. 24. RCW 9.94A.320 and 2000 c
225 s 5, 2000 c 119 s 17, and 2000 c 66 s 2 are each reenacted and amended to
read as follows:

TABLE
2

CRIMES
INCLUDED WITHIN EACH SERIOUSNESS LEVEL

XVIAggravated
Murder 1 (RCW 10.95.020)

XVHomicide
by abuse (RCW 9A.32.055)

Malicious
explosion 1 (RCW 70.74.280(1))

Murder
1 (RCW 9A.32.030)

XIVMurder
2 (RCW 9A.32.050)

XIIIMalicious
explosion 2 (RCW 70.74.280(2))

Malicious
placement of an explosive 1 (RCW 70.74.270(1))

XIIAssault
1 (RCW 9A.36.011)

Assault
of a Child 1 (RCW 9A.36.120)

Malicious
placement of an imitation device 1 (RCW 70.74.272(1)(a))

Rape
1 (RCW 9A.44.040)

Rape
of a Child 1 (RCW 9A.44.073)

XIManslaughter
1 (RCW 9A.32.060)

Rape
2 (RCW 9A.44.050)

Rape
of a Child 2 (RCW 9A.44.076)

XChild
Molestation 1 (RCW 9A.44.083)

Indecent
Liberties (with forcible compulsion) (RCW 9A.44.100(1)(a))

Kidnapping
1 (RCW 9A.40.020)

Leading
Organized Crime (RCW 9A.82.060(1)(a) (as reenacted by this act))

Malicious
explosion 3 (RCW 70.74.280(3))

Manufacture
of methamphetamine (RCW 69.50.401(a)(1)(ii))

Over
18 and deliver heroin, methamphetamine, a narcotic from Schedule I or II, or
flunitrazepam from Schedule IV to someone under 18 (RCW 69.50.406)

IXAssault
of a Child 2 (RCW 9A.36.130)

Controlled
Substance Homicide (RCW 69.50.415)

Explosive
devices prohibited (RCW 70.74.180)

Homicide
by Watercraft, by being under the influence of intoxicating liquor or any drug
(RCW 79A.60.050)

Inciting
Criminal Profiteering (RCW 9A.82.060(1)(b) (as reenacted by this act))

Malicious
placement of an explosive 2 (RCW 70.74.270(2))

Over
18 and deliver narcotic from Schedule III, IV, or V or a nonnarcotic, except
flunitrazepam or methamphetamine, from Schedule I-V to someone under 18 and 3
years junior (RCW 69.50.406)

Robbery
1 (RCW 9A.56.200)

Sexual
Exploitation (RCW 9.68A.040)

Vehicular
Homicide, by being under the influence of intoxicating liquor or any drug (RCW
46.61.520)

VIIIArson
1 (RCW 9A.48.020)

Deliver
or possess with intent to deliver methamphetamine (RCW 69.50.401(a)(1)(ii))

Hit
and Run‑-Death (RCW 46.52.020(4)(a))

Homicide
by Watercraft, by the operation of any vessel in a reckless manner (RCW
79A.60.050)

Manslaughter
2 (RCW 9A.32.070)

Manufacture,
deliver, or possess with intent to deliver amphetamine (RCW 69.50.401(a)(1)(ii))

Manufacture,
deliver, or possess with intent to deliver heroin or cocaine (RCW
69.50.401(a)(1)(i))

Possession
of Ephedrine, Pseudoephedrine, or Anhydrous Ammonia with intent to manufacture
methamphetamine (RCW 69.50.440)

Promoting
Prostitution 1 (RCW 9A.88.070)

Selling
for profit (controlled or counterfeit) any controlled substance (RCW 69.50.410)

Theft
of Anhydrous Ammonia (RCW 69.55.010)

Vehicular
Homicide, by the operation of any vehicle in a reckless manner (RCW 46.61.520)

VIIBurglary
1 (RCW 9A.52.020)

Child
Molestation 2 (RCW 9A.44.086)

Dealing
in depictions of minor engaged in sexually explicit conduct (RCW 9.68A.050)

Drive-by
Shooting (RCW 9A.36.045)

Homicide
by Watercraft, by disregard for the safety of others (RCW 79A.60.050)

Indecent
Liberties (without forcible compulsion) (RCW 9A.44.100(1) (b) and (c))

Introducing
Contraband 1 (RCW 9A.76.140)

Involving
a minor in drug dealing (RCW 69.50.401(f))

Malicious
placement of an explosive 3 (RCW 70.74.270(3))

Sending,
bringing into state depictions of minor engaged in sexually explicit conduct
(RCW 9.68A.060)

Unlawful
Possession of a Firearm in the first degree (RCW 9.41.040(1)(a))

Use
of a Machine Gun in Commission of a Felony (RCW 9.41.225)

Vehicular
Homicide, by disregard for the safety of others (RCW 46.61.520)

VIBail
Jumping with Murder 1 (RCW 9A.76.170(2)(a))

Bribery
(RCW 9A.68.010)

Incest
1 (RCW 9A.64.020(1))

Intimidating
a Judge (RCW 9A.72.160)

Intimidating
a Juror/Witness (RCW 9A.72.110, 9A.72.130)

Malicious
placement of an imitation device 2 (RCW 70.74.272(1)(b))

Manufacture,
deliver, or possess with intent to deliver narcotics from Schedule I or II
(except heroin or cocaine) or flunitrazepam from Schedule IV (RCW
69.50.401(a)(1)(i))

Rape
of a Child 3 (RCW 9A.44.079)

Theft
of a Firearm (RCW 9A.56.300)

Unlawful
Storage of Anhydrous Ammonia (RCW 69.55.020)

VAbandonment
of dependent person 1 (RCW 9A.42.060)

Advancing
money or property for extortionate extension of credit (RCW 9A.82.030 (as
reenacted by this act))

Bail
Jumping with class A Felony (RCW 9A.76.170(2)(b))

Child
Molestation 3 (RCW 9A.44.089)

Criminal
Mistreatment 1 (RCW 9A.42.020)

Custodial
Sexual Misconduct 1 (RCW 9A.44.160)

Delivery
of imitation controlled substance by person eighteen or over to person under
eighteen (RCW 69.52.030(2))

Domestic
Violence Court Order Violation (RCW 10.99.040, 10.99.050, 26.09.300, 26.10.220,
26.26.138, 26.50.110, 26.52.070, or 74.34.145)

Extortion
1 (RCW 9A.56.120)

Extortionate
Extension of Credit (RCW 9A.82.020 (as reenacted by this act))

Extortionate
Means to Collect Extensions of Credit (RCW 9A.82.040 (as reenacted by this
act))

Incest
2 (RCW 9A.64.020(2))

Kidnapping
2 (RCW 9A.40.030)

Perjury
1 (RCW 9A.72.020)

Persistent
prison misbehavior (RCW 9.94.070)

Possession
of a Stolen Firearm (RCW 9A.56.310)

Rape
3 (RCW 9A.44.060)

Rendering
Criminal Assistance 1 (RCW 9A.76.070)

Sexual
Misconduct with a Minor 1 (RCW 9A.44.093)

Sexually
Violating Human Remains (RCW 9A.44.105)

Stalking
(RCW 9A.46.110)

IVArson
2 (RCW 9A.48.030)

Assault
2 (RCW 9A.36.021)

Assault
by Watercraft (RCW 79A.60.060)

Bribing
a Witness/Bribe Received by Witness (RCW 9A.72.090, 9A.72.100)

Commercial
Bribery (RCW 9A.68.060)

Counterfeiting
(RCW 9.16.035(4))

Escape
1 (RCW 9A.76.110)

Hit
and Run‑-Injury (RCW 46.52.020(4)(b))

Hit
and Run with Vessel‑-Injury Accident (RCW 79A.60.200(3))

Indecent
Exposure to Person Under Age Fourteen (subsequent sex offense) (RCW 9A.88.010)

Influencing
Outcome of Sporting Event (RCW 9A.82.070 (as reenacted by this act))

Knowingly
Trafficking in Stolen Property (RCW 9A.82.050(2) (as reenacted by this act))

Malicious
Harassment (RCW 9A.36.080)

Manufacture,
deliver, or possess with intent to deliver narcotics from Schedule III, IV, or
V or nonnarcotics from Schedule I-V (except marijuana, amphetamine,
methamphetamines, or flunitrazepam) (RCW 69.50.401(a)(1) (iii) through (v))

Residential
Burglary (RCW 9A.52.025)

Robbery
2 (RCW 9A.56.210)

Theft
of Livestock 1 (RCW 9A.56.080)

Threats
to Bomb (RCW 9.61.160)

Use
of Proceeds of Criminal Profiteering (RCW 9A.82.080 (1) and (2) (as
reenacted by this act))

Vehicular
Assault (RCW 46.61.522)

Willful
Failure to Return from Furlough (RCW 72.66.060)

IIIAbandonment
of dependent person 2 (RCW 9A.42.070)

Assault
3 (RCW 9A.36.031)

Assault
of a Child 3 (RCW 9A.36.140)

Bail
Jumping with class B or C Felony (RCW 9A.76.170(2)(c))

Burglary
2 (RCW 9A.52.030)

Communication
with a Minor for Immoral Purposes (RCW 9.68A.090)

Criminal
Gang Intimidation (RCW 9A.46.120)

Criminal
Mistreatment 2 (RCW 9A.42.030)

Custodial
Assault (RCW 9A.36.100)

Delivery
of a material in lieu of a controlled substance (RCW 69.50.401(c))

Escape
2 (RCW 9A.76.120)

Extortion
2 (RCW 9A.56.130)

Harassment
(RCW 9A.46.020)

Intimidating
a Public Servant (RCW 9A.76.180)

Introducing
Contraband 2 (RCW 9A.76.150)

Maintaining
a Dwelling or Place for Controlled Substances (RCW 69.50.402(a)(6))

Malicious
Injury to Railroad Property (RCW 81.60.070)

Manufacture,
deliver, or possess with intent to deliver marijuana (RCW 69.50.401(a)(1)(iii))

Manufacture,
distribute, or possess with intent to distribute an imitation controlled
substance (RCW 69.52.030(1))

Patronizing
a Juvenile Prostitute (RCW 9.68A.100)

Perjury
2 (RCW 9A.72.030)

Possession
of Incendiary Device (RCW 9.40.120)

Possession
of Machine Gun or Short-Barreled Shotgun or Rifle (RCW 9.41.190)

Promoting
Prostitution 2 (RCW 9A.88.080)

Recklessly
Trafficking in Stolen Property (RCW 9A.82.050(1) (as reenacted by this act))

Securities
Act violation (RCW 21.20.400)

Tampering
with a Witness (RCW 9A.72.120)

Telephone
Harassment (subsequent conviction or threat of death) (RCW 9.61.230)

Theft
of Livestock 2 (RCW 9A.56.080)

Unlawful
Imprisonment (RCW 9A.40.040)

Unlawful
possession of firearm in the second degree (RCW 9.41.040(1)(b))

Unlawful
Use of Building for Drug Purposes (RCW 69.53.010)

Willful
Failure to Return from Work Release (RCW 72.65.070)

IIComputer
Trespass 1 (RCW 9A.52.110)

Counterfeiting
(RCW 9.16.035(3))

Create,
deliver, or possess a counterfeit controlled substance (RCW 69.50.401(b))

Escape
from Community Custody (RCW 72.09.310)

Health
Care False Claims (RCW 48.80.030)

Malicious
Mischief 1 (RCW 9A.48.070)

Possession
of controlled substance that is either heroin or narcotics from Schedule I or
II or flunitrazepam from Schedule IV (RCW 69.50.401(d))

Possession
of phencyclidine (PCP) (RCW 69.50.401(d))

Possession
of Stolen Property 1 (RCW 9A.56.150)

Theft
1 (RCW 9A.56.030)

Theft
of Rental, Leased, or Lease-purchased Property (valued at one thousand five
hundred dollars or more) (RCW 9A.56.096(4))

Trafficking
in Insurance Claims (RCW 48.30A.015)

Unlawful
Practice of Law (RCW 2.48.180)

Unlicensed
Practice of a Profession or Business (RCW 18.130.190(7))

IAttempting
to Elude a Pursuing Police Vehicle (RCW 46.61.024)

False
Verification for Welfare (RCW 74.08.055)

Forged
Prescription (RCW 69.41.020)

Forged
Prescription for a Controlled Substance (RCW 69.50.403)

Forgery
(RCW 9A.60.020)

Malicious
Mischief 2 (RCW 9A.48.080)

Possess
Controlled Substance that is a Narcotic from Schedule III, IV, or V or
Non-narcotic from Schedule I-V (except phencyclidine or flunitrazepam) (RCW
69.50.401(d))

Possession
of Stolen Property 2 (RCW 9A.56.160)

Reckless
Burning 1 (RCW 9A.48.040)

Taking
Motor Vehicle Without Permission (RCW 9A.56.070)

Theft
2 (RCW 9A.56.040)

Theft
of Rental, Leased, or Lease-purchased Property (valued at two hundred fifty
dollars or more but less than one thousand five hundred dollars) (RCW
9A.56.096(4))

Unlawful
Issuance of Checks or Drafts (RCW 9A.56.060)

Unlawful
Use of Food Stamps (RCW 9.91.140 (2) and (3))

Vehicle
Prowl 1 (RCW 9A.52.095)

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 25. This act is necessary for
the immediate preservation of the public peace, health, or safety, or support
of the state government and its existing public institutions, and takes effect
immediately.

---
END ---