BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF
WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1. RCW 18.04.025 and 1999 c
378 s 1 are each amended to read as follows:

Unless the context
clearly requires otherwise, the definitions in this section apply throughout
this chapter.

(1) "Board"
means the board of accountancy created by RCW 18.04.035.

(2) "Certified
public accountant" or "CPA" means a person holding a certified
public accountant certificate.

(3) "State"
includes the states of the United States, the District of Columbia, Puerto
Rico, Guam, and the United States Virgin Islands.

(4) "Reports on
financial statements" means any reports or opinions prepared by certified
public accountants, based on services performed in accordance with generally
accepted auditing standards, standards for attestation engagements, or
standards for accounting and review services as to whether the presentation of
information used for guidance in financial transactions or for accounting for
or assessing the status or performance of commercial and noncommercial
enterprises, whether public, private, or governmental, conforms with generally
accepted accounting principles or other comprehensive bases of accounting.

(5) The "practice
of public accounting" means performing or offering to perform by a person
or firm holding itself out to the public as a licensee, for a client or
potential client, one or more kinds of services involving the use of accounting
or auditing skills, including the issuance of "audit reports,"
"review reports," or "compilation reports" on financial
statements, or one or more kinds of management advisory, or consulting
services, or the preparation of tax returns, or the furnishing of advice on tax
matters. The "practice of public accounting" shall not include practices
that are permitted under the provisions of RCW 18.04.350(((6))) (7)
by persons or firms not required to be licensed under this chapter.

(6) "Firm"
means a sole proprietorship, a corporation, or a partnership. "Firm"
also means a limited liability company formed under chapter 25.15 RCW.

(7) "CPE"
means continuing professional education.

(8)
"Certificate" means a certificate as a certified public accountant
issued under this chapter, or a corresponding certificate issued by another
state or foreign jurisdiction that is recognized in accordance with the
reciprocity provisions of RCW 18.04.180 and 18.04.183.

(9)
"Licensee" means the holder of a ((valid)) license to
practice public accountancy or a permit for practice privileges issued
under this chapter.

(10) "License"
means a license to practice public accountancy or a permit for practice
privileges issued to an individual ((or)) under this chapter, or
a license to practice public accountancy issued to a firm under this
chapter.

(11) "Quality
assurance review" means a process established by and conducted at the
direction of the board of study, appraisal, or review of one or more aspects of
the professional work of a person or firm in the practice of public
accountancy, by a person or persons who hold certificates and who are not
affiliated with the person or firm being reviewed.

(12) "Quality
review" means a study, appraisal, or review of one or more aspects of the
professional work of a person or firm in the practice of public accountancy, by
a person or persons who hold certificates and who are not affiliated with the
person or firm being reviewed, including a peer review, or any internal review
or inspection intended to comply with quality control policies and procedures,
but not including the "quality assurance review" under subsection
(11) of this section.

(13) "Review
committee" means any person carrying out, administering or overseeing a
quality review authorized by the reviewee.

(14) "Rule"
means any rule adopted by the board under authority of this chapter.

(15) "Holding
out" means any representation to the public by the use of restricted
titles as set forth in RCW 18.04.345 by a person or firm that the person or
firm is a certified public accountant and that the person or firm offers to
perform any professional services to the public as a certified public
accountant. "Holding out" shall not affect or limit a person not
required to hold a certificate under this chapter or a person or firm not
required to hold a license under this chapter from engaging in practices
identified in RCW 18.04.350(((6))) (7).

Sec. 2. RCW 18.04.350 and 1992 c
103 s 15 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) Nothing in this
chapter prohibits any person not a certified public accountant from serving as
an employee of, or as assistant to, a certified public accountant or
partnership composed of certified public accountants or corporation of
certified public accountants holding a valid license under RCW 18.04.215.
However, the employee or assistant shall not issue any accounting or financial
statement over his or her name.

(2) Nothing in this
chapter prohibits a certified public accountant ((registered)) holding
a valid certificate or license to practice public accountancy in another
state, or any accountant of a foreign country holding a valid
certificate, degree or license which permits him or her to practice
therein from temporarily practicing in this state on professional business
incident to his or her regular practice provided he or she does not
advertise to provide services in this state and he or she does not maintain an
office location in this state.

(3) Nothing in this
chapter prohibits a certified public accountant holding a valid certificate or
license to practice in another state from obtaining a three-year permit for
practice privileges from the board. The permit for practice privileges allows
a certified public accountant who does not have a principal place of business
in this state to provide services on a regular basis, advertise to provide
services, and maintain an office in this state. The board shall establish by
rule the requirements for obtaining a three-year permit for practice
privileges, which must include a fee comparable to the fee for a license to
practice public accountancy. The certified public accountant issued a permit
for practice privileges shall abide by this chapter and the rules under this
chapter. Out-of-state certified public accountants holding a valid permit for
practice privileges are subject to discipline for violation of this chapter.
However, they are exempt from the continuing education requirements of this
chapter provided they have met the continuing education requirements of the
state in which they hold a valid certificate or license.

(4) Nothing in
this chapter prohibits a certified public accountant, a partnership, or
corporation of certified public accountants, or any of their employees from
disclosing any data in confidence to other certified public accountants,
quality or peer review teams, partnerships, or corporations of public
accountants or to the board or any of its employees engaged in conducting
quality, quality assurance, or peer reviews, or any one of their employees in
connection with quality or peer reviews of that accountant's accounting and
auditing practice conducted under the auspices of recognized professional
associations.

(((4))) (5)
Nothing in this chapter prohibits a certified public accountant, a partnership,
or corporation of certified public accountants, or any of their employees from
disclosing any data in confidence to any employee, representative, officer, or
committee member of a recognized professional association, or to the board of
accountancy, or any of its employees or committees in connection with a professional
investigation held under the auspices of recognized professional associations
or the board of accountancy.

(((5))) (6)
Nothing in this chapter prohibits any officer, employee, partner, or principal
of any organization:

(a) From affixing his
or her signature to any statement or report in reference to the affairs of the
organization with any wording designating the position, title, or office which
he or she holds in the organization; or

(b) From describing
himself or herself by the position, title, or office he or she holds in such
organization.

(((6))) (7)
Nothing in this chapter prohibits any person, or partnership or corporation
composed of persons not holding a license under RCW 18.04.215 from offering or
rendering to the public bookkeeping, accounting, tax services, the devising and
installing of financial information systems, management advisory, or consulting
services, the preparation of tax returns, or the furnishing of advice on tax
matters, the preparation of financial statements, written statements describing
how such financial statements were prepared, or similar services, provided that
persons, partnerships, or corporations not holding a license under RCW
18.04.215 who offer or render these services do not designate any written
statement as an "audit report," "review report," or
"compilation report," do not issue any written statement which
purports to express or disclaim an opinion on financial statements which have
been audited, and do not issue any written statement which expresses assurance
on financial statements which have been reviewed.

(((7))) (8)
Nothing in this chapter prohibits any act of or the use of any words by a
public official or a public employee in the performance of his or her duties.

(((8)))
(9) Nothing contained in this chapter prohibits any person who holds
only a valid certified public accountant certificate from assuming or using the
designation "certified public accountant" or "CPA" or any
other title, designation, words, letters, sign, card, or device tending to
indicate the person is a certified public accountant, provided, that such
person shall not hold himself or herself out to the public as engaged in the
practice of public accounting unless that person holds a valid license in
addition to the certificate under RCW 18.04.215.

---
END ---