BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF
WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1. RCW 36.70A.130 and 1997
c 429 s 10 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) Each comprehensive
land use plan and development regulations shall be subject to continuing review
and evaluation by the county or city that adopted them. Not later than September
1, 2002, and at least every five years thereafter, a county or city shall take
action to formally review and, if needed, revise its policies and
regulations regarding critical areas and natural resource lands to ensure that
these policies and regulations comply with this chapter.

(2) A county or city
planning under RCW 36.70A.040 shall take action to formally review and, if
needed, revise its comprehensive land use plan and development regulations according
to the following schedule to ensure that the plan and regulations ((are
complying)) comply with the requirements of this chapter:

(a) Not later than
September 1, 2004, and every five years thereafter, for a county or city
subject to the requirements of RCW 36.70A.215;

(b) Not later than
September 1, 2006, and every ten years thereafter, for a county or city not
subject to the requirements of RCW 36.70A.215 that adopted its comprehensive
plan according to this chapter between January 1, 1992, and January 1, 1997;
and

(c) Not later than
September 1, 2008, and every ten years thereafter, for a county or city not
subject to the requirements of RCW 36.70A.215 that adopted its comprehensive
plan according to this chapter after January 1, 1997.

(3) A county or city
that becomes required or chooses to plan under RCW 36.70A.040 after July 1,
2001, shall take action to formally review and, if needed, revise its
comprehensive plan and development regulations no later than:

(a) According to the
schedule in subsection (2)(a) of this section for a county or city subject to
the requirements of RCW 36.70A.215; or

(b) Ten years after
the date it was required to adopt its initial comprehensive plan and
development regulations according to this chapter for a county or city not
subject to RCW 36.70A.215 and every ten years thereafter.

(4) The formal
review and evaluation required by ((this)) subsection (2) of this
section may be combined with the review required by subsection (((3)))
(8) of this section.

(5) Any
amendment or revision to a comprehensive land use plan shall conform to this
chapter, and any change to development regulations shall be consistent with and
implement the comprehensive plan.

(((2))) (6)
For purposes of this section, "take action to review" includes the
submittal by a county or city of an evaluation to the department, no later than
one year before the date specified for the county or city in the schedule
specified in subsection (2) of this section, describing its review and
evaluation process and a schedule for considering amendments as needed to
ensure compliance with this chapter.

(7)(a) Each
county and city shall establish and broadly disseminate to the public a public
participation program identifying procedures whereby proposed amendments or
revisions of the comprehensive plan are considered by the governing body of the
county or city no more frequently than once every year except that amendments
may be considered more frequently under the following circumstances:

(i) The initial
adoption of a subarea plan;

(ii) The adoption or
amendment of a shoreline master program under the procedures set forth in
chapter 90.58 RCW; and

(iii) The amendment of
the capital facilities element of a comprehensive plan that occurs concurrently
with the adoption or amendment of a county or city budget.

(b) Except as otherwise
provided in (a) of this subsection, all proposals shall be considered by the
governing body concurrently so the cumulative effect of the various proposals
can be ascertained. However, after appropriate public participation a county or
city may adopt amendments or revisions to its comprehensive plan that conform
with this chapter whenever an emergency exists or to resolve an appeal of a
comprehensive plan filed with a growth management hearings board or with the
court.

(((3))) (8)
Each county that designates urban growth areas under RCW 36.70A.110 shall
review, at least every ten years, its designated urban growth area or areas,
and the densities permitted within both the incorporated and unincorporated
portions of each urban growth area. In conjunction with this review by the
county, each city located within an urban growth area shall review the
densities permitted within its boundaries, and the extent to which the urban
growth occurring within the county has located within each city and the
unincorporated portions of the urban growth areas. The county comprehensive
plan designating urban growth areas, and the densities permitted in the urban
growth areas by the comprehensive plans of the county and each city located
within the urban growth areas, shall be revised to accommodate the urban growth
projected to occur in the county for the succeeding twenty-year period. The
review required by this subsection may be combined with the review and
evaluation required by RCW 36.70A.215.

NEW SECTION.
Sec. 2. A county or city shall
not be obligated to satisfy the requirements of section 1 of this act if the
county or city has not received specific funding to satisfy the requirements of
section 1 of this act during the biennium corresponding to the schedules
specified in section 1 (1), (2), and (3) of this act.

---
END ---