BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF
WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec.
1. Local governments are
continuously subject to demands for new or enhanced services. These same
jurisdictions are asked to reduce costs and operate more efficiently with
limited revenues. Jurisdictions in rural counties are particularly impacted by
a declining economy.

The legislature finds
that local governments in rural counties are in need of financial assistance in
order to maintain an adequate infrastructure. Accordingly, the legislature
exempts local governments in rural counties from the payment of prevailing
wages on public works projects.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
2. A new section is added
to chapter 39.12 RCW to read as follows:

This
chapter shall not apply to any rural county with a population under ten
thousand, or any municipality or political subdivision with a population under
ten thousand located in a rural county. For the purposes of this section,
"rural county" has the same meaning as in RCW 82.14.370(5).

---
END ---