BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF
WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1. RCW 10.14.080 and 1995 c
246 s 36 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) Upon filing a
petition for a civil antiharassment protection order under this chapter, the
petitioner may obtain an ex parte temporary antiharassment protection order.
An ex parte temporary antiharassment protection order may be granted with or
without notice upon the filing of an affidavit which, to the satisfaction of
the court, shows reasonable proof of unlawful harassment of the petitioner by
the respondent and that great or irreparable harm will result to the petitioner
if the temporary antiharassment protection order is not granted.

(2) An ex parte
temporary antiharassment protection order shall be effective for a fixed period
not to exceed fourteen days or twenty-four days if the court has permitted
service by publication under RCW 10.14.085. The ex parte order may be
reissued. A full hearing, as provided in this chapter, shall be set for not
later than fourteen days from the issuance of the temporary order or not later
than twenty-four days if service by publication is permitted. Except as
provided in RCW 10.14.070 and 10.14.085, the respondent shall be personally
served with a copy of the ex parte order along with a copy of the petition and notice
of the date set for the hearing. The notice shall contain the same
information as provided in the summons required under RCW 10.14.085(3).

(3) At the hearing, if
the court finds by a preponderance of the evidence that unlawful harassment
exists, a civil antiharassment protection order shall issue prohibiting such
unlawful harassment.

(4) An order issued
under this chapter shall be effective for not more than one year unless the
court finds that the respondent is likely to resume unlawful harassment of the
petitioner when the order expires. If so, the court may enter an order for a
fixed time exceeding one year or may enter a permanent antiharassment
protection order. The court shall not enter an order that is effective for
more than one year if the order restrains the respondent from contacting the
respondent's minor children. This limitation is not applicable to civil
antiharassment protection orders issued under chapter 26.09, 26.10, or 26.26
RCW. If the petitioner seeks relief for a period longer than one year on
behalf of the respondent's minor children, the court shall advise the
petitioner that the petitioner may apply for renewal of the order as provided
in this chapter or if appropriate may seek relief pursuant to chapter 26.09 or
26.10 RCW.

(5) At any time within
the three months before the expiration of the order, the petitioner may apply
for a renewal of the order by filing a petition for renewal. The petition for
renewal shall state the reasons why the petitioner seeks to renew the protection
order. Upon receipt of the petition for renewal, the court shall order a
hearing which shall be not later than fourteen days from the date of the
order. Except as provided in RCW 10.14.085, personal service shall be made
upon the respondent not less than five days before the hearing. If timely
service cannot be made the court shall set a new hearing date and shall either
require additional attempts at obtaining personal service or permit service by
publication as provided by RCW 10.14.085. If the court permits service by
publication, the court shall set the new hearing date not later than
twenty-four days from the date of the order. If the order expires because
timely service cannot be made the court shall grant an ex parte order of
protection as provided in this section. The court shall grant the petition for
renewal unless the respondent proves by a preponderance of the evidence that
the respondent will not resume harassment of the petitioner when the order
expires. The court may renew the protection order for another fixed time
period or may enter a permanent order as provided in subsection (4) of this
section.

(6) The court, in
granting an ex parte temporary antiharassment protection order or a civil
antiharassment protection order, shall have broad discretion to grant such
relief as the court deems proper, including an order:

(a) Restraining the
respondent from making any attempts to contact the petitioner;

(b) Restraining the
respondent from making any attempts to keep the petitioner under surveillance;

(c) Requiring the
respondent to stay a stated distance from the petitioner's residence and
workplace; and

(d) Considering the
provisions of RCW 9.41.800.

(7) A petitioner may
not obtain an ex parte temporary antiharassment protection order against a
respondent if the petitioner has previously obtained two such ex parte orders
against the same respondent but has failed to obtain the issuance of a civil
antiharassment protection order unless good cause for such failure can be
shown.

(8) The court order
shall specify the date an order issued pursuant to subsections (4) and (5) of
this section expires if any. The court order shall also state whether the
court issued the protection order following personal service or service by
publication and whether the court has approved service by publication of an
order issued under this section.

Sec. 2. RCW 10.14.100 and 1992 c
143 s 15 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) An order issued
under this chapter shall be personally served upon the respondent, except as
provided in subsections (5) and (7) of this section.

(2) The sheriff of the
county or the peace officers of the municipality in which the respondent
resides shall serve the respondent personally unless the petitioner elects to
have the respondent served by a private party.

(3) If the sheriff or
municipal peace officer cannot complete service upon the respondent within ten
days, the sheriff or municipal peace officer shall notify the petitioner.

(4) Returns of service
under this chapter shall be made in accordance with the applicable court rules.

(5) If an order entered
by the court recites that the respondent appeared in person before the court,
the necessity for further service is waived and proof of service of that order
is not necessary. The court's order, entered after a hearing, need not be
served on a respondent who fails to appear before the court, if material terms
of the order have not changed from those contained in the temporary order, and
it is shown to the court's satisfaction that the respondent has previously been
personally served with the temporary order.

(6) Except in cases
where the petitioner is granted leave to proceed in forma pauperis, municipal
police departments serving documents as required under this chapter may collect
the same fees for service and mileage authorized by RCW 36.18.040 to be
collected by sheriffs.

(7) If the
court previously entered an order allowing service by publication of the notice
of hearing and temporary order of protection pursuant to RCW 10.14.085, the
court may permit service by publication of the order of protection issued under
RCW 10.14.080. Service by publication must comply with the requirements of RCW
10.14.085.

---
END ---