BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF
WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1. RCW 36.70A.367 and 1998
c 289 s 2 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) In addition to the
major industrial development allowed under RCW 36.70A.365, a rural
county ((required or choosing to plan)) planning under RCW
36.70A.040 ((that meets the criteria in subsection (9) of this section))
may establish, in consultation with cities consistent with provisions of RCW
36.70A.210, a process for designating a bank of no more than two master planned
locations for major industrial activity outside urban growth areas.

(2) A master planned
location for major industrial developments outside an urban growth area may be
included in the urban industrial land bank for the county if criteria
including, but not limited to, the following are met:

(a) New infrastructure
is provided for and/or applicable impact fees are paid;

(b) Transit-oriented
site planning and traffic demand management programs are implemented;

(c) Buffers are
provided between the major industrial development and adjacent nonurban areas;

(d) Environmental
protection including air and water quality has been addressed and provided for;

(e) Development
regulations are established to ensure that urban growth will not occur in
adjacent nonurban areas;

(f) Provision is made
to mitigate adverse impacts on designated agricultural lands, forest lands, and
mineral resource lands;

(g) The plan for the
major industrial development is consistent with the county's development
regulations established for protection of critical areas; and

(h) An inventory of
developable land has been conducted as provided in RCW 36.70A.365.

(3) In selecting master
planned locations for inclusion in the urban industrial land bank, priority
shall be given to locations that are adjacent to, or in close proximity to, an
urban growth area.

(4) Final approval of
inclusion of a master planned location in the urban industrial land bank shall
be considered an adopted amendment to the comprehensive plan adopted pursuant
to RCW 36.70A.070, except that RCW 36.70A.130(2) does not apply so that
inclusion or exclusion of master planned locations may be considered at any
time.

(5) Once a master
planned location has been included in the urban industrial land bank,
manufacturing and industrial businesses that qualify as major industrial
development under RCW 36.70A.365 may be located there.

(6) Nothing in this
section may be construed to alter the requirements for a county to comply with
chapter 43.21C RCW.

(7) ((The authority
of a county to engage in the process of including or excluding master planned
locations from the urban industrial land bank shall terminate on December 31,
1999. However,)) Any location included in ((the)) an
urban industrial land bank on or before December 31, 1999, pursuant
to section 2, chapter 289, Laws of 1998, section 1, chapter 402, Laws of 1997,
or section 2, chapter 167, Laws of 1996 shall remain available for major
industrial development as long as the criteria of subsection (2) of this
section continue to be met.

(8) For the purposes of
this section((,)):

(a) "Major
industrial development" means a master planned location suitable for
manufacturing or industrial businesses that: (((a))) (i)
Requires a parcel of land so large that no suitable parcels are available
within an urban growth area; or (((b))) (ii) is a natural
resource-based industry requiring a location near agricultural land, forest
land, or mineral resource land upon which it is dependent; or (((c))) (iii)
requires a location with characteristics such as proximity to transportation
facilities or related industries such that there is no suitable location in an
urban growth area. The major industrial development may not be for the purpose
of retail commercial development or multitenant office parks.

(((9) This section
applies to a county that at the time the process is established under
subsection (1) of this section:

(a) Has a population
greater than two hundred fifty thousand and is part of a metropolitan area that
includes a city in another state with a population greater than two hundred
fifty thousand;

(b) Has a population
greater than one hundred forty thousand and is adjacent to another country; or

(c) Has a population
greater than forty thousand but less than seventy-five thousand and has an
average level of unemployment for the preceding three years that exceeds the
average state unemployment for those years by twenty percent; and

(i) Is bordered by
the Pacific Ocean; or

(ii) Is located in
the Interstate 5 or Interstate 90 corridor.))

(b)
"Rural county" has the same meaning as in RCW 82.14.370(5).

--- END ---