BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF
WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1. RCW 90.03.380 and 1997 c
442 s 801 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) The right to the
use of water which has been applied to a beneficial use in the state shall be
and remain appurtenant to the land or place upon which the same is used:
PROVIDED, HOWEVER, That the right may be transferred to another or to others
and become appurtenant to any other land or place of use without loss of
priority of right theretofore established if such change can be made without
detriment or injury to existing rights. The point of diversion of water for
beneficial use or the purpose of use may be changed, if such change can be made
without detriment or injury to existing rights. A change in the place of use,
point of diversion, and/or purpose of use of a water right to enable irrigation
of additional acreage or the addition of new uses may be permitted if such
change results in no increase in the annual consumptive quantity of water used
under the water right. For purposes of this section, "annual consumptive
quantity" means the estimated or actual annual amount of water diverted
pursuant to the water right, reduced by the estimated annual amount of return
flows, averaged over the two years of greatest water use within the most
recent five-year period of continuous beneficial use of the water right.
Before any transfer of such right to use water or change of the point of
diversion of water or change of purpose of use can be made, any person having
an interest in the transfer or change, shall file a written application
therefor with the department, and the application shall not be granted until
notice of the application is published as provided in RCW 90.03.280. If it
shall appear that such transfer or such change may be made without injury or
detriment to existing rights, the department shall issue to the applicant a
certificate in duplicate granting the right for such transfer or for such
change of point of diversion or of use. The certificate so issued shall be
filed and be made a record with the department and the duplicate certificate
issued to the applicant may be filed with the county auditor in like manner and
with the same effect as provided in the original certificate or permit to
divert water.

(2) If an application
for change proposes to transfer water rights from one irrigation district to
another, the department shall, before publication of notice, receive
concurrence from each of the irrigation districts that such transfer or change
will not adversely affect the ability to deliver water to other landowners or
impair the financial integrity of either of the districts.

(3) A change in place
of use by an individual water user or users of water provided by an irrigation
district need only receive approval for the change from the board of directors
of the district if the use of water continues within the irrigation district,
and when water is provided by an irrigation entity that is a member of a board
of joint control created under chapter 87.80 RCW, approval need only be
received from the board of joint control if the use of water continues within
the area of jurisdiction of the joint board and the change can be made without
detriment or injury to existing rights.

(4) This
section shall not apply to trust water rights acquired by the state through the
funding of water conservation projects under chapter 90.38 RCW or RCW 90.42.010
through 90.42.070.

--- END ---