BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF
WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1. RCW 90.03.390 and 1991 c
350 s 3 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) RCW
90.03.380 shall not be construed to prevent water users from making a seasonal
or temporary change of point of diversion or place of use of water when such
change can be made without detriment to existing rights((, but in no case
shall such change be made without the permission of the water master of the
district in which such proposed change is located, or of the department. Nor
shall RCW 90.03.380 be construed to prevent construction of emergency interties
between public water systems to permit exchange of water during short-term
emergency situations, or rotation in the use of water for bringing about a more
economical use of the available supply, provided however, that the department
of health in consultation with the department of ecology shall adopt rules or
develop written guidelines setting forth standards for determining when a
short-term emergency exists and the circumstances in which emergency interties
are permitted. The rules or guidelines shall be consistent with the procedures
established in RCW 43.83B.400 through 43.83B.420)). Water users owning
lands to which water rights are attached may rotate in the use of water to
which they are collectively entitled, or an individual water user having lands
to which are attached water rights of a different priority, may in like manner
rotate in use when such rotation can be made without detriment to other
existing water rights((, and has the approval of the water master or
department)). Before rotating the use of water, the water right holder
shall notify the department of the change and describe the land subject to the
rotation in use.

(2) A person may
change the place of use of a water right without the requirement of approval
under this section where the water is used on land contiguous to the place of
use of the water right, the land is owned or leased by the holder of the water
right, and the total amount of land to which the water is applied is not
increased. Before making the change, the water right holder shall notify the
department of the change and describe the land subject to the change in place
of use. This subsection does not apply to the use of water within an
irrigation district or to changes in use that increase the total amount of
acreage irrigated under a water right.

(3) RCW
90.03.380 shall not be construed to prevent construction of emergency interties
between public water systems to permit exchange of water during short-term emergency
situations, or rotation in the use of water for bringing about a more
economical use of the available supply, however, the department of health in
consultation with the department of ecology shall adopt rules or develop
written guidelines setting forth standards for determining when a short-term
emergency exists and the circumstances in which emergency interties are
permitted. The rules or guidelines shall be consistent with the procedures
established in RCW 43.83B.400 through 43.83B.420.

--- END ---