BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF
WASHINGTON:

_4 NEW SECTION. Sec. 1. The
following acts or parts of acts are each

_5 repealed:

_6 (1) RCW 49.28.100 (Hours of
operators of power equipment in

_7 waterfront operations) and 1953 c 271 s 1; and

_8 (2) RCW 49.28.110 (Hours of
operators of power equipment in

_9 waterfront operations‑-Penalty) and 1953 c 271 s
2.

‑‑‑ END ‑‑‑

p. 1 HB
1598