BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF
WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1. RCW 19.27.170 and 1991 c
347 s 16 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) The state building
code council shall adopt rules under chapter 34.05 RCW that implement and
incorporate the water conservation performance standards in subsections (4) and
(5) of this section. These standards shall apply to all new construction and
all remodeling involving replacement of plumbing fixtures in all residential,
hotel, motel, school, industrial, commercial use, or other occupancies
determined by the council to use significant quantities of water.

(2) The legislature
recognizes that a phasing-in approach to these new standards is appropriate.
Therefore, standards in subsection (4) of this section shall take effect on
July 1, 1990. The standards in subsection (5) of this section shall take
effect July 1, 1993.

(3) No individual,
public or private corporation, firm, political subdivision, government agency,
or other legal entity may, for purposes of use in this state, distribute, sell,
offer for sale, import, install, or approve for installation any plumbing
fixtures unless the fixtures meet the standards as provided for in this
section.

(4) Standards for water
use efficiency effective July 1, 1990.

(a) Standards for
waterclosets. The guideline for maximum water use allowed in gallons per flush
(gpf) for any of the following waterclosets is the following:

Tank-type toilets.................................... 3.5
gpf.

Flushometer-valve
toilets............................ 3.5 gpf.

Flushometer-tank
toilets............................. 3.5 gpf.

Electromechanical
hydraulic toilets.................. 3.5 gpf.

(b) Standard for
urinals. The guideline for maximum water use allowed for any urinal is 3.0
gallons per flush.

(c) Standard for
showerheads. The guideline for maximum water use allowed for any showerhead is
3.0 gallons per minute.

(d) Standard for
faucets. The guideline for maximum water use allowed in gallons per minute
(gpm) for any of the following faucets and replacement aerators is the
following:

Bathroom faucets..................................... 3.0
gpm.

Lavatory faucets..................................... 3.0
gpm.

Kitchen faucets...................................... 3.0
gpm.

Replacement aerators................................. 3.0
gpm.

(e) Except where
designed and installed for use by the physically handicapped, lavatory faucets
located in restrooms intended for use by the general public must be equipped
with a metering valve designed to close by spring or water pressure when left
unattended (self-closing).

(f) No urinal or
watercloset that operates on a continuous flow or continuous flush basis shall
be permitted.

(5) Standards for water
use efficiency effective July 1, 1993.

(a) Standards for
waterclosets. The guideline for maximum water use allowed in gallons per flush
(gpf) for any of the following waterclosets is the following:

Tank-type toilets.................................... 1.6
gpf.

Flushometer-tank toilets............................. 1.6
gpf.

Electromechanical
hydraulic toilets.................. 1.6 gpf.

(b) Standards for
urinals. The guideline for maximum water use allowed for any urinal is 1.0
gallons per flush.

(c) Standards for
showerheads. The guideline for maximum water use allowed for any showerhead is
2.5 gallons per minute.

(d) Standards for
faucets. The guideline for maximum water use allowed in gallons per minute for
any of the following faucets and replacement aerators is the following:

Bathroom faucets..................................... 2.5
gpm.

Lavatory faucets..................................... 2.5
gpm.

Kitchen faucets...................................... 2.5
gpm.

Replacement aerators................................. 2.5
gpm.

(e) Except where
designed and installed for use by the physically handicapped, lavatory faucets
located in restrooms intended for use by the general public must be equipped
with a metering valve designed to close by water pressure when unattended
(self-closing).

(f) No urinal or
watercloset that operates on a continuous flow or continuous basis shall be
permitted.

(6) The building code
council shall establish methods and procedures for testing and identifying
fixtures that meet the standards established in subsection (5) of this
section. The council shall use the testing standards designated as American
national standards, written under American national standards institute
procedures or other widely recognized national testing standards. The council
shall either review test results from independent testing laboratories that are
submitted by manufacturers of plumbing fixtures or accept data submitted to and
evaluated by the international association of plumbing and mechanical
officials. The council shall publish and widely distribute a current list of
fixtures that meet the standards established in subsection (5) of this section.

(7) The building code
council shall adopt rules for marking and labeling fixtures meeting the
standards established in subsection (5) of this section.

(8) This section shall
not apply to fixtures installed before July 28, 1991, that are removed and
relocated to another room or area of the same building after July 28, 1991, nor
shall it apply to fixtures, as determined by the council, that in order to
perform a specialized function, cannot meet the standards specified in this
section.

(9) The water
conservation performance standards shall supersede all local government codes.
After July 1, 1990, cities, towns, and counties shall not amend the code
revisions and standards established under subsection (4) or (5) of this
section.

(10) By August 1,
2001, the state building code council shall adopt emergency rules under chapter
34.05 RCW that implement and incorporate the water conservation standard for
automatically operated landscape irrigation systems provided by subsection (11)
of this section and thereafter shall adopt permanent rules implementing and
incorporating the standard.

(11) After the
effective date of rules adopted under subsection (10) of this section, no
person may install an automatic landscape irrigation system for a residential,
hotel, motel, school, governmental, industrial, or commercial facility or
replace more than fifty percent of such an existing system or expand by more
than fifty percent such an existing system without installing a rain sensor
device that prohibits irrigation by the system during the time that the rain
sensor indicates that adequate moisture is available to the plants being
irrigated. The council shall determine how adequate moisture is to be measured
under this subsection. Landscape irrigation systems do not include irrigation
systems installed for the commercial production of agricultural crops nor
irrigation systems installed for agricultural or silvicultural research plots
of state institutions of higher education.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 2. This act is necessary for
the immediate preservation of the public peace, health, or safety, or support
of the state government and its existing public institutions, and takes effect
immediately.

---
END ---