BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF
WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec.
1. A new section is added
to chapter 19.158 RCW to read as follows:

(1) The department of
licensing shall provide for the establishment and operation of a public listing
of residential telephone numbers whose subscribers have affirmatively requested
not to receive commercial telephone solicitations. The department of licensing
may contract with a private vendor to establish, operate, and maintain such
registry in accordance with the requirements of this section. The department
of licensing and the utilities and transportation commission shall make
reasonable efforts to publicize the availability of the public listing and the
method or methods by which residential telephone subscribers may have their
telephone numbers placed on the list. The listing shall be available for
inspection by the public in written and electronic form. The listing shall be
transmitted quarterly to a national telephone preference service for the
purpose of removing individuals from national telemarketing lists.

(2) No fee may be
charged to residential telephone subscribers for placing their numbers on the
list. A reasonable fee, as determined by the department of licensing, may be
charged to inspect the list in written or electronic form.

(3) It is unlawful and
a violation of this section for any person to make a commercial telephone
solicitation before first obtaining a copy of the most recent national
telephone preference service list available before making the commercial
telephone solicitation call.

(4) It is unlawful and
a violation of this section for any person to make a commercial telephone
solicitation call to any residential telephone number that is contained on the
public listing under subsection (1) of this section and which has been on the
quarterly transmitted list of the national telephone preference service for at
least sixty days.

(5) In
addition to any other penalties or remedies available under this chapter or
chapter 19.86 RCW, a person injured by a violation of subsection (3) or (4) of
this section may bring an action for recovery of liquidated damages in the
amount of one thousand dollars per violation, plus court costs and attorneys'
fees.

--- END ---