BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF
WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec.
1. The purpose of this act
is to enhance the performance audit and review authority of the legislature
by: (1) Restructuring the joint legislative audit and review committee, and
the office of legislative auditor, to more closely resemble the federal general
accounting office and comptroller general; (2) providing greater autonomy for
the legislative auditor; and (3) renaming the legislative agency that performs
the legislature's performance auditing and review authority as the performance
audit office, which is headed by the legislative auditor.

PART I - LEGISLATIVE AUDITOR

Sec. 101. RCW 44.28.005 and 1996 c
288 s 2 are each amended to read as follows:

Unless the context
clearly requires otherwise, the definitions in this section apply throughout
this chapter.

(1) "Legislative
auditor" means the executive officer of the ((joint legislative audit
and review committee)) performance audit office.

(2) (("Economy
and efficiency audits" means performance audits that establish: (a)
Whether a state agency or unit of local government receiving state funds is
acquiring, protecting, and using its resources such as personnel, property, and
space economically and efficiently; (b) the causes of inefficiencies or
uneconomical practices; and (c) whether the state agency or local government
has complied with significant laws and rules in acquiring, protecting, and
using its resources.

(3))) "Final compliance report" means a
written document((, as approved by the joint committee,)) prepared by
the legislative auditor that states the specific actions a state agency or
unit of local government receiving state funds has taken to implement recommendations
contained in the final performance audit report and the preliminary compliance
report. Any recommendations, including proposed legislation and changes in the
agency's rules and practices or the local government's practices, based on testimony
received, must be included in the final compliance report.

(((4))) (3)
"Final performance audit report" means a written document ((adopted
by the joint legislative audit and review committee)) that contains ((the))
findings and ((proposed recommendations made in the preliminary performance
audit report, the)) final recommendations ((adopted by the joint
committee,)) of the legislative auditor, after considering any
comments to the preliminary performance audit report that are made by ((the
joint committee, and any comments to the preliminary performance audit report
by)) members of the performance audit office and the state agency or
local government that was audited.

(((5) "Joint
committee" means the joint legislative audit and review committee.

(6))) (4) "Local government" means
a city, town, county, special purpose district, political subdivision,
municipal corporation, or quasi-municipal corporation, including a public
corporation created by such an entity.

(((7))) (5)
"Performance audit" means an objective and systematic assessment of a
state agency or any of its programs, functions, or activities, or a ((unit
of)) local government receiving state funds, by an independent evaluator in
order to help public officials improve efficiency, effectiveness, and
accountability. Performance audits include economy and efficiency ((audits
and program audits)) elements establishing: (a) Whether a state agency
or unit of local government receiving state funds is acquiring, protecting, and
using its resources such as personnel, property, and space economically and
efficiently; (b) the causes of inefficiencies or uneconomical practices; and
(c) whether the state agency or local government has complied with significant
laws and rules in acquiring, protecting, and using its resources. Performance
audits also include program elements determining the extent to which desired
outcomes or results are being achieved, the causes for not achieving intended
outcomes or results, and compliance with significant laws and rules applicable
to the program. A performance audit of a local government may only be made
to determine whether the local government is using state funds for their
intended purpose in an efficient and effective manner.

(((8))) (6)
"Performance audit office" or "office" means the office
created by this chapter to provide performance audits and other reviews for the
legislature.

(7)
"Performance measures" are a composite of key indicators of a
program's or activity's inputs, outputs, outcomes, productivity, timeliness,
and/or quality. They are means of evaluating policies and programs by
measuring results against agreed upon program goals or standards.

(((9))) (8)
"Preliminary compliance report" means a written document that states
the specific actions a state agency or unit of local government receiving state
funds has taken to implement any recommendations contained in the final
performance audit report.

(((10))) (9)
"Preliminary performance audit report" means a written document
prepared for review and comment by the ((joint legislative audit and review
committee)) legislative auditor after the completion of a
performance audit. The preliminary performance audit report must contain the
audit findings and any proposed recommendations to improve the efficiency,
effectiveness, or accountability of the state agency or local government
audited.

(((11) "Program
audits" means performance audits that determine: (a) The extent to which
desired outcomes or results are being achieved; (b) the causes for not achieving
intended outcomes or results; and (c) compliance with significant laws and
rules applicable to the program.

(12))) (10) "State agency" or
"agency" means a state agency, department, office, officer, board,
commission, bureau, division, institution, or institution of higher education.
"State agency" includes all elective offices in the executive branch
of state government.

Sec. 102. RCW 44.28.010 and 1996 c
288 s 3 are each amended to read as follows:

The ((joint
legislative audit and review committee)) performance audit office is
created, ((which)) consisting of members, the legislative auditor,
and employees. Members of the office shall consist of eight senators and
eight representatives from the legislature and the state auditor serving, ex
officio, as a nonvoting member. The senate members of the ((committee))
office shall be appointed by the president of the senate, and the house
members of the ((committee)) office shall be appointed by the
speaker of the house. Not more than four members from each house shall be from
the same political party. Members shall be appointed before the close of each
regular session of the legislature during an odd-numbered year. If before the
close of a regular session during an odd-numbered year, the governor issues a
proclamation convening the legislature into special session, or the legislature
by resolution convenes the legislature into special session, following such
regular session, then ((such)) the appointments shall be made as
a matter of closing business of ((such)) the special session.
Members shall be subject to confirmation, as to the senate members by the
senate, and as to the house members by the house. In the event of a failure to
appoint or confirm ((joint committee)) members, the members of the ((joint
committee)) office from either house in which there is a failure to
appoint or confirm shall be elected by the members of such house.

Sec. 103. RCW 44.28.020 and 1996 c
288 s 4 are each amended to read as follows:

The term of office of
the appointed members of the ((joint committee)) performance
audit office who continue to be members of the senate and house shall be
from the close of the session in which they were appointed or elected as
provided in RCW 44.28.010 until the close of the next regular session during an
odd-numbered year or special session following such regular session, or, in the
event that such appointments or elections are not made, until the close of the
next regular session during an odd-numbered year during which successors are
appointed or elected. The term of office of ((joint committee)) appointed
members who do not continue to be members of the senate and house ceases upon
the convening of the next regular session of the legislature during an
odd-numbered year after their confirmation, election or appointment. Vacancies
on the ((joint committee)) performance audit office shall be
filled by appointment by the remaining members. All such vacancies shall be filled
from the same political party and from the same house as the member whose seat
was vacated.

Sec. 104. RCW 44.28.030 and 1996 c
288 s 5 are each amended to read as follows:

On and after the
commencement of a succeeding general session of the legislature, those appointed
members of the ((joint committee)) performance audit office who
continue to be members of the senate and house, respectively, shall continue as
members of the ((joint committee)) office as indicated in RCW 44.28.020
and the ((joint committee)) office shall continue with all its
powers, duties, authorities, records, papers, personnel and staff, and all
funds made available for its use.

Sec. 105. RCW 44.28.050 and 1989 c
137 s 1 are each amended to read as follows:

All expenses incurred
by the ((committee)) performance audit office, including salaries
and expenses of employees and the legislative auditor, shall be paid
upon voucher forms as provided and signed by the legislative auditor,
except that vouchers for the salary and expenses of the legislative auditor
shall be signed by the chair or vice-chair. ((The legislative auditor
may be authorized by the legislative budget committee's executive committee to
sign vouchers. Such authorization shall specify a dollar limitation and be set
out in writing.)) A monthly report of ((such)) the vouchers
shall be submitted to the executive committee. ((If authorization is not
given to the legislative auditor then the chair, or the vice-chair in the
chair's absence, is authorized to sign vouchers. This authority shall continue
until the chair's or vice-chair's successors are selected after each ensuing
session of the legislature.)) Vouchers may be drawn on funds appropriated
generally by the legislature for legislative expenses or upon any special
appropriation which may be provided by the legislature for the expenses of the
((committee)) performance audit office or both.

Sec. 106. RCW 44.28.060 and 1996 c
288 s 7 are each amended to read as follows:

The members of the ((joint
committee)) performance audit office shall form an executive committee
consisting of the state auditor and one member from each of the four
major political caucuses((, which shall include)). The executive
committee shall select a chair and a vice-chair from among its
legislative members. The chair and vice-chair shall serve for a period not
to exceed two years. The chair and the vice-chair may not be members of the
same political party. The chair shall alternate between the members of the
majority parties in the senate and the house of representatives.

The executive committee
is responsible for performing all ((general administrative and personnel
duties assigned to it in the rules and procedures adopted by the joint
committee, as well as other duties)) responsibilities delegated to
it by the ((joint committee)) majority of all members of the office.
((The executive committee shall recommend applicants for the position of the
legislative auditor to the membership of the joint committee. The legislative
auditor shall be hired with the approval of a majority of the membership of the
joint committee. The executive committee shall set the salary of the
legislative auditor.))

The ((joint
committee)) members of the performance audit office shall adopt
rules and procedures for its orderly operation. The ((joint committee))
members of the performance audit office may create subcommittees to
perform duties under this chapter.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
107. A new section is added
to chapter 44.28 RCW to read as follows:

The members of the
performance audit office shall appoint the legislative auditor for a ten-year
term of office and set the salary of the legislative auditor. The legislative
auditor may only be removed from office by concurrent resolution of both houses
of the legislature, but only for permanent disability, inefficiency, neglect of
duty, malfeasance, or conviction of a felony or conduct involving moral
turpitude.

Sec. 108. RCW 44.28.065 and 1996 c
288 s 8 are each amended to read as follows:

The legislative auditor
shall:

(1) Establish, hire
employees for, and manage the performance audit office ((of the
joint legislative audit and review committee to carry out the functions of this
chapter));

(2) Direct the audit
and review functions described in this chapter and ensure that performance
audits are performed in accordance with the "Government Auditing
Standards" published by the comptroller general of the United States as
applicable to the scope of the audit;

(3) Investigate all
matters related to the receipt, disbursement, and use of public money by state
agencies and local governments;

(4) Estimate the
cost to the state of a specific appropriation and report each estimate to the
legislature with recommendations that the legislative auditor considers
desirable;

(5) Analyze the
expenditures of any state agency and expenditures of state funds distributed or
provided to local governments, that the legislative auditor believes will help
the legislature decide whether public money has been used and expended
economically and efficiently;

(6) Make performance
audits, together with findings and recommendations, to the ((joint
committee and under its direction to the)) state legislature and
committees of the state legislature concerning the organization and operation
of state agencies and ((the expenditure of)) local government
operations that are in whole or in part funded by state funds ((by units
of local government)), that are included in the performance audit work
plan;

(((4) In
consultation with and with the approval of the executive committee,)) (7)
Hire staff necessary to carry out the purposes of this chapter. Employee
salaries, other than the legislative auditor, shall be set by the legislative
auditor ((with the approval of the executive committee));

(((5))) (8)
Assist the several standing committees of the house and senate in consideration
of legislation affecting state departments and their efficiency; appear before
other legislative committees; and assist any ((other)) legislative committee
upon instruction by the ((joint legislative audit and review committee))
members of the performance audit office;

(((6))) (9)
Provide the legislature with information obtained under the direction of the ((joint
legislative audit and review committee)) members of the performance
audit office; and

(((7))) (10)
Maintain a record of all work performed by the legislative auditor ((under
the direction of the joint legislative audit and review committee)) and
keep and make available all documents, data, and reports submitted to the
legislative auditor by any legislative committee.

Sec. 109. RCW 44.28.071 and 1996 c
288 s 9 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) In conducting
performance audits and other reviews, the legislative auditor shall work
closely with the chairs and staff of standing committees of the senate and
house of representatives, and may work in consultation with the ((state
auditor and the)) director of financial management.

(2) The legislative
auditor may contract with and consult with public and private independent
professional and technical experts as necessary in conducting the performance
audits. The legislative auditor should also involve front-line employees and
internal auditors in the performance audit process to the highest possible
degree.

(3) The legislative
auditor shall work with the legislative evaluation and accountability program
committee and the office of financial management to develop information system
capabilities necessary for the performance audit requirements of this chapter.

(4) The legislative
auditor shall work with the legislative office of performance review and the
office of financial management to facilitate the implementation of effective
performance measures throughout state government. In agencies and programs
where effective systems for performance measurement exist, the measurements
incorporated into those systems should be a basis for performance audits
conducted under this chapter.

Sec. 110. RCW 44.28.075 and 1996 c
288 s 10 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) Subject to the
requirements of the performance audit work plan approved by ((the joint
committee)) members of the performance audit office under RCW
44.28.083, performance audits may, in addition to the ((determinations))
factors and matters that may be made in such an audit as specified in
RCW 44.28.005, include the following:

(a) An examination of
the costs and benefits of agency programs, functions, and activities;

(b) Identification of
viable alternatives for reducing costs or improving service delivery;

(c) Identification of
gaps and overlaps in service delivery, along with corrective action; and

(d) Comparison with
other states whose agencies perform similar functions, as well as their
relative funding levels and performance.

(2) As part of a
performance audit, the legislative auditor may review the costs of programs
recently implemented by the legislature to compare actual agency costs with the
appropriations provided and the cost estimates that were included in the fiscal
note for the program at the time the program was enacted.

Sec. 111. RCW 44.28.080 and 1996 c
288 s 11 are each amended to read as follows:

The ((joint
committee has the following powers)) legislative auditor shall:

(1) ((To)) Make
examinations and reports concerning whether or not appropriations are being
expended for the purposes and within the statutory restrictions provided by the
legislature; and concerning the organization and operation of procedures
necessary or desirable to promote economy, efficiency, and effectiveness in
state government, its officers, boards, committees, commissions, institutions,
and other state agencies, and ((to)) make recommendations and reports to
the legislature.

(2) ((To)) Make
such other studies and examinations of economy, efficiency, and effectiveness
of state government and its state agencies as ((it)) the legislative
auditor may find advisable, and ((to)) hear complaints, hold
hearings, gather information, and make findings of fact with respect thereto.

(3) ((To)) Conduct
program and fiscal reviews of any state agency or program scheduled for
termination under the process provided under chapter 43.131 RCW.

(4) ((To)) Perform
other legislative staff studies of state government or the use of state funds.

(5) ((To)) Conduct
performance audits in accordance with the work plan adopted by ((the joint
committee)) members of the performance audit office under RCW ((44.28.180))
44.28.083.

(6) ((To)) Receive
a copy of each report of examination or audit issued by the state auditor for
examinations or audits that were conducted at the request of the ((joint
committee)) members of the performance audit office and ((to))
make recommendations as ((it)) the legislative auditor deems
appropriate as a separate addendum to the report or audit.

(7) ((To)) Develop
internal tracking procedures that will allow the legislature to measure the
effectiveness of performance audits conducted by the ((joint committee))
legislative auditor including, where appropriate, measurements of
cost-savings and increases in efficiency and effectiveness in how state
agencies deliver their services.

(8) ((To)) Receive
messages and reports in person or in writing from the governor or any other
state officials and ((to)) study generally any and all business relating
to economy, efficiency, and effectiveness in state government and state
agencies.

Sec. 112. RCW 44.28.083 and 1996 c
288 s 12 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) During the regular
legislative session of each odd-numbered year, beginning with 1997, the ((joint
legislative audit and review committee)) members of the performance
audit office shall develop and approve a performance audit work plan for the
legislative auditor to follow over the subsequent sixteen to twenty‑four‑month
period and an overall work plan that identifies state agency programs, state
agencies, and local government programs that are in whole or in part funded by
state moneys, for which formal evaluation appears necessary. Consideration
shall be given to recommendations presented by legislative standing committees.
Among the factors to be considered in preparing the work plans are:

(a) Whether a program
newly created or significantly altered by the legislature warrants continued
oversight because (i) the fiscal impact of the program is significant, or (ii)
the program represents a relatively high degree of risk in terms of reaching
the stated goals and objectives for that program;

(b) Whether
implementation of an existing program has failed to meet its goals and
objectives by any significant degree; and

(c) Whether a follow-up
audit would help ensure that previously identified recommendations for
improvements were being implemented.

(2) The project
description for each performance audit must include start and completion dates,
the proposed approach, and cost estimates.

(3) The legislative
auditor may consult with the chairs and staff of appropriate legislative
committees, the state auditor, and the director of financial management in
developing the performance audit work plan.

(4) The
performance audit work plan and the overall work plan may include proposals to
employ contract resources. As conditions warrant, the performance audit work
plan and the overall work plan may be amended from time to time. All
performance audit work plans shall be transmitted to the appropriate fiscal and
policy committees of the senate and the house of representatives no later than
the sixtieth day of the regular legislative session of each odd-numbered year((,
beginning with 1997)). All overall work plans shall be transmitted to the
appropriate fiscal and policy committees of the senate and the house of
representatives.

Sec. 113. RCW 44.28.088 and 1996 c
288 s 13 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) When the legislative
auditor has completed a performance audit authorized in the performance audit
work plan, the legislative auditor shall transmit the preliminary performance
audit report to the affected state agency or local government and the office of
financial management for response or comment. The state agency
or local government and the office of financial management shall provide any
response or comment to the legislative auditor within thirty days after
receipt of the preliminary performance audit report unless a different time
period is approved by the ((joint committee)) legislative auditor.
The legislative auditor shall incorporate or respond to the responses
and comments of the state agency or local government and the office
of financial management ((into)) in the final performance audit
report.

(2) Before releasing
the results of a performance audit to the legislature or the public, the
legislative auditor shall submit the preliminary performance audit report to
the ((joint committee for its)) members of the performance audit
office for review, comments, and ((final)) recommendations. Any
comments by the ((joint committee)) members of the performance audit
office must be included as a separate addendum to the final performance
audit report. Upon consideration and incorporation of the review, comments,
and recommendations of the ((joint committee)) members of the
performance audit office, the legislative auditor shall transmit the final
performance audit report to the affected agency or local government, the
director of financial management, the leadership of the senate and the house of
representatives, and the appropriate standing committees of the house of
representatives and the senate and shall publish the results and make the
report available to the public. For purposes of this section, "leadership
of the senate and the house of representatives" means the speaker of the
house, the majority leaders of the senate and the house of representatives, the
minority leaders of the senate and the house of representatives, the caucus
chairs of both major political parties of the senate and the house of
representatives, and the floor leaders of both major political parties of the
senate and the house of representatives.

Sec. 114. RCW 44.28.094 and 1996 c
288 s 15 are each amended to read as follows:

Subject to ((the
joint committee's)) approval by the members of the performance audit
office, the ((office of the joint committee)) legislative auditor
and the performance audit office shall undergo an external quality control
review within three years of June 6, 1996, and at regular intervals
thereafter. The review must be conducted by an independent organization that
has experience in conducting performance audits. The quality control review
must include, at a minimum, an evaluation of the quality of the audits
conducted by the ((joint committee)) legislative auditor, an
assessment of the audit procedures used by the ((joint committee)) legislative
auditor, and an assessment of the qualifications of the ((joint
committee)) legislative auditor and staff of the performance
audit office to conduct performance audits.

Sec. 115. RCW 44.28.097 and 1996 c
288 s 18 are each amended to read as follows:

All agency reports
concerning program performance, including administrative review, quality
control, and other internal audit or performance reports, as requested by the
((joint committee)) legislative auditor, shall be furnished by
the agency requested to provide such report.

Sec. 116. RCW 44.28.100 and 1996 c
288 s 19 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) The ((joint
committee)) legislative auditor may make reports from time to time
to the members of the legislature and to the public with respect to any of ((its))
the legislative auditor's findings or recommendations.

(2) The ((joint
committee shall keep)) legislative auditor shall ensure that
complete minutes of ((its)) the meetings of the members of the
performance audit office are kept.

Sec. 117. RCW 44.28.110 and 1955 c
206 s 8 are each amended to read as follows:

In the
discharge of any duty herein imposed, the ((committee or any personnel under
its authority and its subcommittees shall have)) legislative auditor has
the authority to examine and inspect all properties, equipment, facilities,
files, records and accounts of any state ((office, department, institution,
board, committee, commission or)) agency((,)) or local government
and to administer oaths((,)). If authorized by majority vote of the
members of the performance audit office, the legislative auditor may issue
subpoenas, compel the attendance of witnesses and the production of any papers,
books, accounts, documents and testimony, and to cause the deposition of
witnesses, either residing within or without the state, to be taken in the
manner prescribed by laws for taking depositions in civil actions in the
superior courts.

Sec. 118. RCW 44.28.120 and 1996 c
288 s 20 are each amended to read as follows:

In case of the failure
on the part of any person to comply with any subpoena issued in behalf of the
((joint committee)) legislative auditor, or on the refusal of any
witness to testify to any matters regarding which he or she may be lawfully
interrogated, it shall be the duty of the superior court of any county, or of
the judge thereof, on application of the ((joint committee)) legislative
auditor, to compel obedience by proceedings for contempt, as in the case of
disobedience of the requirements of a subpoena issued from such court or a
refusal to testify therein.

Sec. 119. RCW 44.28.130 and 1996 c
288 s 21 are each amended to read as follows:

Each
witness who appears before the ((joint committee)) legislative
auditor by ((its)) order of the legislative auditor, other
than a state official or employee, shall receive for his or her attendance the
fees and mileage provided for witnesses in civil cases in courts of record,
which shall be audited and paid upon the presentation of proper vouchers signed
by such witness((, verified)) and approved by the legislative
auditor((, and approved by the chair and the vice-chair of the joint
committee)).

Sec. 120. RCW 44.28.150 and 1996 c
288 s 22 are each amended to read as follows:

The ((joint
committee)) legislative auditor shall cooperate, act, and function with
legislative committees and with the councils or committees of other states
similar to ((this joint committee)) the legislative auditor and
with other interstate research organizations.

Sec. 121. RCW 44.28.155 and 1997 c
58 s 705 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) The ((joint
legislative audit and review committee)) legislative auditor shall
conduct an evaluation of the effectiveness of the WorkFirst program described
in chapter 58, Laws of 1997, including the job opportunities and basic skills
training program and any approved private, county, or local government
WorkFirst program. The evaluation shall assess the success of the program in
assisting clients to become employed and to reduce their use of temporary assistance
for needy families. The study shall include but not be limited to the
following:

(a) An assessment of
employment outcomes, including hourly wages, hours worked, and total earnings,
for clients;

(b) A comparison of
temporary assistance for needy families outcomes, including grant amounts and
program exits, for clients; and

(c) An audit of the
performance-based contract for each private nonprofit contractor for job
opportunities and basic skills training program services. The ((joint
legislative audit and review committee)) legislative auditor may
contract with the Washington institute for public policy for appropriate
portions of the evaluation required by this section.

(2) Administrative data
shall be provided by the department of social and health services, the
employment security department, the state board for community and technical
colleges, local governments, and private contractors. The department of social
and health services shall require contractors to provide administrative and
outcome data needed for this study as a condition of contract compliance.

Sec. 122. RCW 44.28.800 and 1998 c
297 s 61 are each amended to read as follows:

The ((joint
legislative audit and review committee)) legislative auditor shall
conduct an evaluation of the efficiency and effectiveness of chapter 297, Laws
of 1998 in meeting its stated goals. Such an evaluation shall include the
operation of the state mental hospitals and the regional support networks, as
well as any other appropriate entity. The ((joint legislative audit and
review committee)) legislative auditor shall prepare an interim
report of ((its)) the legislative auditor's findings which shall
be delivered to the appropriate legislative committees of the house of
representatives and the senate no later than September 1, 2000. In addition,
the ((joint legislative audit and review committee)) legislative
auditor shall prepare a final report of ((its)) the legislative
auditor's findings which shall be delivered to the appropriate legislative
committees of the house of representatives and the senate no later than January
1, 2001.

PART II - REFERENCES

Sec. 201. RCW 28A.630.830 and 1996
c 288 s 26 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) The selection
advisory committee is created. The committee shall be composed of up to three
members from the house of representatives, up to three members from the senate,
up to two members from the office of the superintendent of public instruction,
and one member from each of the following: The office of financial management,
Washington state special education coalition, transitional bilingual
instruction educators, and Washington education association.

(2) The ((joint
legislative audit and review committee)) legislative auditor and the
superintendent of public instruction shall provide staff for the selection
advisory committee.

(3) The selection
advisory committee shall:

(a) Develop appropriate
criteria for selecting demonstration projects;

(b) Issue requests for
proposals in accordance with RCW 28A.630.820 through 28A.630.845 for
demonstration projects;

(c) Review proposals
and recommend demonstration projects for approval by the superintendent of
public instruction; and

(d) Advise the
superintendent of public instruction on the evaluation design.

Sec. 202. RCW 28B.20.382 and 1999
c 346 s 3 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) Until authorized by
statute of the legislature, the board of regents of the university, with
respect to the university tract, shall not sell the land or any part thereof or
any improvement thereon, or lease the land or any part thereof or any
improvement thereon or renew or extend any lease thereof for a term of more
than eighty years. Any sale of the land or any part thereof or any improvement
thereon, or any lease or renewal or extension of any lease of the land or any
part thereof or any improvement thereon for a term of more than eighty years
made or attempted to be made by the board of regents shall be null and void
until the same has been approved or ratified and confirmed by legislative act.

(2) The board of
regents shall have power from time to time to lease the land, or any part
thereof or any improvement thereon for a term of not more than eighty years.
Any and all records, books, accounts, and agreements of any lessee or sublessee
under this section, pertaining to compliance with the terms and conditions of
such lease or sublease, shall be open to inspection by the board of regents, the
legislative auditor, and the ways and means committee of the senate((,))
and the appropriations committee of the house of representatives, ((and
the joint legislative audit and review committee)) or any successor
committees. It is not intended that unrelated records, books, accounts, and
agreements of lessees, sublessees, or related companies be open to such
inspection. The board of regents shall make a full, detailed report of all
leases and transactions pertaining to the land or any part thereof or any
improvement thereon to the ((joint legislative audit and review committee))
legislative auditor, including one copy to the staff of the committee,
during odd-numbered years.

(3) The net proceeds
from the sale or lease of land in the university tract, or any part thereof or
any improvement thereon, shall be deposited into the University of Washington
facilities bond retirement account hereby established outside the state
treasury as a nonappropriated local fund to be used exclusively for the purpose
of erecting, altering, maintaining, equipping, or furnishing buildings at the
University of Washington. The board of regents shall transfer from the
University of Washington facilities bond retirement account to the University
of Washington building account under RCW 43.79.080 any funds in excess of
amounts reasonably necessary for payment of debt service in combination with
other nonappropriated local funds related to capital projects for which debt
service is required under section 4, chapter 380, Laws of 1999.

Sec. 203. RCW 39.29.080 and 1997 c
373 s 1 are each amended to read as follows:

A state agency may not
enter into a personal services contract with a consultant under which the
consultant could charge additional costs to the agency, the ((joint
legislative audit and review committee)) legislative auditor, or the
state auditor for access to data generated under the contract. A consultant
under such contract shall provide access to data generated under the contract
to the contracting agency, the ((joint legislative audit and review
committee)) legislative auditor, and the state auditor. For
purposes of this section, "data" includes all information that
supports the findings, conclusions, and recommendations of the consultant's
reports, including computer models and the methodology for those models.

Sec. 204. RCW 41.06.070 and 1998 c
245 s 40 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) The provisions of
this chapter do not apply to:

(a) The members of the
legislature or to any employee of, or position in, the legislative branch of
the state government including the legislative auditor, state actuary, and
members, officers, and employees of the ((legislative council, joint
legislative audit and review committee)) performance audit office,
statute law committee, and any ((interim)) other office, authority,
agency, or committee of the legislature;

(b) The justices of the
supreme court, judges of the court of appeals, judges of the superior courts or
of the inferior courts, or to any employee of, or position in the judicial
branch of state government;

(c) Officers, academic
personnel, and employees of technical colleges;

(d) The officers of the
Washington state patrol;

(e) Elective officers
of the state;

(f) The chief executive
officer of each agency;

(g) In the departments
of employment security and social and health services, the director and the
director's confidential secretary; in all other departments, the executive head
of which is an individual appointed by the governor, the director, his or her
confidential secretary, and his or her statutory assistant directors;

(h) In the case of a
multimember board, commission, or committee, whether the members thereof are
elected, appointed by the governor or other authority, serve ex officio, or are
otherwise chosen:

(i) All members of such
boards, commissions, or committees;

(ii) If the members of
the board, commission, or committee serve on a part-time basis and there is a
statutory executive officer: The secretary of the board, commission, or
committee; the chief executive officer of the board, commission, or committee;
and the confidential secretary of the chief executive officer of the board,
commission, or committee;

(iii) If the members of
the board, commission, or committee serve on a full-time basis: The chief
executive officer or administrative officer as designated by the board,
commission, or committee; and a confidential secretary to the chair of the
board, commission, or committee;

(iv) If all members of
the board, commission, or committee serve ex officio: The chief executive
officer; and the confidential secretary of such chief executive officer;

(i) The confidential
secretaries and administrative assistants in the immediate offices of the
elective officers of the state;

(j) Assistant attorneys
general;

(k) Commissioned and
enlisted personnel in the military service of the state;

(l) Inmate, student,
part-time, or temporary employees, and part-time professional consultants, as
defined by the Washington personnel resources board;

(m) The public printer
or to any employees of or positions in the state printing plant;

(n) Officers and
employees of the Washington state fruit commission;

(o) Officers and
employees of the Washington state apple advertising commission;

(p) Officers and
employees of the Washington state dairy products commission;

(q) Officers and
employees of the Washington tree fruit research commission;

(r) Officers and
employees of the Washington state beef commission;

(s) Officers and
employees of any commission formed under chapter 15.66 RCW;

(t) ((Officers and
employees of the state wheat commission formed under chapter 15.63 RCW;

(u))) Officers and employees of agricultural
commissions formed under chapter 15.65 RCW;

(((v))) (u)
Officers and employees of the nonprofit corporation formed under chapter 67.40
RCW;

(((w))) (v)
Executive assistants for personnel administration and labor relations in all
state agencies employing such executive assistants including but not limited to
all departments, offices, commissions, committees, boards, or other bodies
subject to the provisions of this chapter and this subsection shall prevail
over any provision of law inconsistent herewith unless specific exception is
made in such law;

(((x))) (w)
In each agency with fifty or more employees: Deputy agency heads, assistant
directors or division directors, and not more than three principal policy
assistants who report directly to the agency head or deputy agency heads;

(((y))) (x)
All employees of the marine employees' commission;

(((z) Up to a total
of five senior staff positions of the western library network under chapter
27.26 RCW responsible for formulating policy or for directing program
management of a major administrative unit. This subsection (1)(z) shall expire
on June 30, 1997;

(aa))) (y) Staff employed by the department of
community, trade, and economic development to administer energy policy
functions and manage energy site evaluation council activities under RCW
43.21F.045(2)(m);

(((bb))) (z)
Staff employed by Washington State University to administer energy education,
applied research, and technology transfer programs under RCW 43.21F.045 as
provided in RCW 28B.30.900(5).

(2) The following
classifications, positions, and employees of institutions of higher education
and related boards are hereby exempted from coverage of this chapter:

(a) Members of the
governing board of each institution of higher education and related boards, all
presidents, vice-presidents, and their confidential secretaries,
administrative, and personal assistants; deans, directors, and chairs; academic
personnel; and executive heads of major administrative or academic divisions
employed by institutions of higher education; principal assistants to executive
heads of major administrative or academic divisions; other managerial or
professional employees in an institution or related board having substantial
responsibility for directing or controlling program operations and accountable
for allocation of resources and program results, or for the formulation of institutional
policy, or for carrying out personnel administration or labor relations
functions, legislative relations, public information, development, senior
computer systems and network programming, or internal audits and
investigations; and any employee of a community college district whose place of
work is one which is physically located outside the state of Washington and who
is employed pursuant to RCW 28B.50.092 and assigned to an educational program
operating outside of the state of Washington;

(b) Student, part-time,
or temporary employees, and part-time professional consultants, as defined by
the Washington personnel resources board, employed by institutions of higher
education and related boards;

(c) The governing board
of each institution, and related boards, may also exempt from this chapter
classifications involving research activities, counseling of students,
extension or continuing education activities, graphic arts or publications
activities requiring prescribed academic preparation or special training as
determined by the board: PROVIDED, That no nonacademic employee engaged in
office, clerical, maintenance, or food and trade services may be exempted by
the board under this provision;

(d) Printing craft
employees in the department of printing at the University of Washington.

(3) In addition to the
exemptions specifically provided by this chapter, the Washington personnel
resources board may provide for further exemptions pursuant to the following
procedures. The governor or other appropriate elected official may submit
requests for exemption to the Washington personnel resources board stating the
reasons for requesting such exemptions. The Washington personnel resources
board shall hold a public hearing, after proper notice, on requests submitted
pursuant to this subsection. If the board determines that the position for
which exemption is requested is one involving substantial responsibility for
the formulation of basic agency or executive policy or one involving directing
and controlling program operations of an agency or a major administrative
division thereof, the Washington personnel resources board shall grant the
request and such determination shall be final as to any decision made before
July 1, 1993. The total number of additional exemptions permitted under this
subsection shall not exceed one percent of the number of employees in the
classified service not including employees of institutions of higher education
and related boards for those agencies not directly under the authority of any
elected public official other than the governor, and shall not exceed a total
of twenty-five for all agencies under the authority of elected public officials
other than the governor.

The salary and fringe
benefits of all positions presently or hereafter exempted except for the chief
executive officer of each agency, full-time members of boards and commissions,
administrative assistants and confidential secretaries in the immediate office
of an elected state official, and the personnel listed in subsections (1)(j)
through (((v), (y), (z))) (u), (x), and (2) of this section,
shall be determined by the Washington personnel resources board. However,
beginning with changes proposed for the 1997-99 fiscal biennium, changes to the
classification plan affecting exempt salaries must meet the same provisions for
classified salary increases resulting from adjustments to the classification
plan as outlined in RCW 41.06.152.

Any person holding a
classified position subject to the provisions of this chapter shall, when and
if such position is subsequently exempted from the application of this chapter,
be afforded the following rights: If such person previously held permanent
status in another classified position, such person shall have a right of
reversion to the highest class of position previously held, or to a position of
similar nature and salary.

Any classified employee
having civil service status in a classified position who accepts an appointment
in an exempt position shall have the right of reversion to the highest class of
position previously held, or to a position of similar nature and salary.

A person occupying an
exempt position who is terminated from the position for gross misconduct or
malfeasance does not have the right of reversion to a classified position as
provided for in this section.

Sec. 205. RCW 42.48.060 and 1996 c
288 s 34 are each amended to read as follows:

Nothing in this chapter
is applicable to, or in any way affects, the powers and duties of the state
auditor or the ((joint legislative audit and review committee)) legislative
auditor.

Sec. 206. RCW 43.09.310 and 1996 c
288 s 35 are each amended to read as follows:

The state auditor shall
annually audit the statewide combined financial statements prepared by the
office of financial management and make post-audits of state agencies.
Post-audits of state agencies shall be made at such periodic intervals as is
determined by the state auditor. Audits of combined financial statements shall
include determinations as to the validity and accuracy of accounting methods,
procedures and standards utilized in their preparation, as well as the accuracy
of the financial statements themselves. A report shall be made of each such
audit and post-audit upon completion thereof, and one copy shall be transmitted
to the governor, one to the director of financial management, one to the state
agency audited, one to the ((joint legislative audit and review committee))
legislative auditor, one each to the standing committees on ways and
means of the house and senate, one to the chief clerk of the house, one to the
secretary of the senate, and at least one shall be kept on file in the office
of the state auditor. A copy of any report containing findings of
noncompliance with state law shall be transmitted to the attorney general.

Sec. 207. RCW 43.79.270 and 1998 c
177 s 1 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) Whenever any money,
from the federal government, or from other sources, which was not anticipated
in the budget approved by the legislature has actually been received and is
designated to be spent for a specific purpose, the head of any department,
agency, board, or commission through which such expenditure shall be made is to
submit to the governor a statement which may be in the form of a request for an
allotment amendment setting forth the facts constituting the need for such
expenditure and the estimated amount to be expended: PROVIDED, That no
expenditure shall be made in excess of the actual amount received, and no money
shall be expended for any purpose except the specific purpose for which it was
received. A copy of any proposal submitted to the governor to expend money
from an appropriated fund or account in excess of appropriations provided by law
which is based on the receipt of unanticipated revenues shall be submitted to
the ((joint legislative audit and review committee)) legislative
auditor and also to the standing committees on ways and means of the house
and senate if the legislature is in session at the same time as it is
transmitted to the governor.

(2) Notwithstanding
subsection (1) of this section, whenever money from any source that was not
anticipated in the transportation budget approved by the legislature has
actually been received and is designated to be spent for a specific purpose,
the head of a department, agency, board, or commission through which the
expenditure must be made shall submit to the governor a statement, which may be
in the form of a request for an allotment amendment, setting forth the facts
constituting the need for the expenditure and the estimated amount to be
expended. However, no expenditure may be made in excess of the actual amount
received, and no money may be expended for any purpose except the specific purpose
for which it was received. A copy of any proposal submitted to the governor to
expend money from an appropriated transportation fund or account in excess of
appropriations provided by law that is based on the receipt of unanticipated
revenues must be submitted, at a minimum, to the standing committees on
transportation of the house and senate, if the legislature is in session, at
the same time as it is transmitted to the governor. During the legislative
interim, any such proposal must be submitted to the legislative transportation
committee.

Sec. 208. RCW 43.79.280 and 1998 c
177 s 2 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) If the governor
approves such estimate in whole or part, he shall endorse on each copy of the
statement his approval, together with a statement of the amount approved in the
form of an allotment amendment, and transmit one copy to the head of the
department, agency, board, or commission authorizing the expenditure. An
identical copy of the governor's statement of approval and a statement of the
amount approved for expenditure shall be transmitted simultaneously to the ((joint
legislative audit and review committee)) legislative auditor and
also to the standing committee on ways and means of the house and senate of all
executive approvals of proposals to expend money in excess of appropriations
provided by law.

(2) If the governor
approves an estimate with transportation funding implications, in whole or
part, he shall endorse on each copy of the statement his approval, together
with a statement of the amount approved in the form of an allotment amendment,
and transmit one copy to the head of the department, agency, board, or
commission authorizing the expenditure. An identical copy of the governor's statement
of approval of a proposal to expend transportation money in excess of
appropriations provided by law and a statement of the amount approved for
expenditure must be transmitted simultaneously to the standing committees on
transportation of the house and senate. During the legislative interim, all
estimate approvals endorsed by the governor along with a statement of the
amount approved in the form of an allotment amendment must be transmitted
simultaneously to the legislative transportation committee.

Sec. 209. RCW 43.88.020 and 2000
2nd sp.s. c 4 s 11 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) "Budget"
means a proposed plan of expenditures for a given period or purpose and the
proposed means for financing these expenditures.

(2) "Budget
document" means a formal statement, either written or provided on any
electronic media or both, offered by the governor to the legislature, as
provided in RCW 43.88.030.

(3) "Director of
financial management" means the official appointed by the governor to
serve at the governor's pleasure and to whom the governor may delegate
necessary authority to carry out the governor's duties as provided in this
chapter. The director of financial management shall be head of the office of
financial management which shall be in the office of the governor.

(4) "Agency"
means and includes every state office, officer, each institution, whether
educational, correctional, or other, and every department, division, board, and
commission, except as otherwise provided in this chapter.

(5) "Public
funds", for purposes of this chapter, means all moneys, including cash,
checks, bills, notes, drafts, stocks, and bonds, whether held in trust, for
operating purposes, or for capital purposes, and collected or disbursed under
law, whether or not such funds are otherwise subject to legislative
appropriation, including funds maintained outside the state treasury.

(6)
"Regulations" means the policies, standards, and requirements, stated
in writing, designed to carry out the purposes of this chapter, as issued by
the governor or the governor's designated agent, and which shall have the force
and effect of law.

(7) "Ensuing
biennium" means the fiscal biennium beginning on July 1st of the same year
in which a regular session of the legislature is held during an odd-numbered
year pursuant to Article II, section 12 of the Constitution and which biennium
next succeeds the current biennium.

(8) "Dedicated
fund" means a fund in the state treasury, or a separate account or fund in
the general fund in the state treasury, that by law is dedicated, appropriated,
or set aside for a limited object or purpose; but "dedicated fund"
does not include a revolving fund or a trust fund.

(9) "Revolving
fund" means a fund in the state treasury, established by law, from which
is paid the cost of goods or services furnished to or by a state agency, and
which is replenished through charges made for such goods or services or through
transfers from other accounts or funds.

(10) "Trust
fund" means a fund in the state treasury in which designated persons or
classes of persons have a vested beneficial interest or equitable ownership, or
which was created or established by a gift, grant, contribution, devise, or
bequest that limits the use of the fund to designated objects or purposes.

(11)
"Administrative expenses" means expenditures for: (a) Salaries,
wages, and related costs of personnel and (b) operations and maintenance
including but not limited to costs of supplies, materials, services, and
equipment.

(12) "Fiscal
year" means the year beginning July 1st and ending the following June
30th.

(13) "Lapse"
means the termination of authority to expend an appropriation.

(14) "Legislative
fiscal committees" means the ((joint legislative audit and review
committee)) legislative auditor, the legislative evaluation and
accountability program committee, the ways and means and transportation
committees of the senate and house of representatives, and, where appropriate,
the legislative transportation committee.

(15) "Fiscal
period" means the period for which an appropriation is made as specified
within the act making the appropriation.

(16) "Primary
budget driver" means the primary determinant of a budget level, other than
a price variable, which causes or is associated with the major expenditure of
an agency or budget unit within an agency, such as a caseload, enrollment,
workload, or population statistic.

(17) "State tax
revenue limit" means the limitation created by chapter 43.135 RCW.

(18) "General
state revenues" means the revenues defined by Article VIII, section 1(c)
of the state Constitution.

(19) "Annual
growth rate in real personal income" means the estimated percentage growth
in personal income for the state during the current fiscal year, expressed in
constant value dollars, as published by the office of financial management or
its successor agency.

(20) "Estimated
revenues" means estimates of revenue in the most recent official economic
and revenue forecast prepared under RCW 82.33.020, and prepared by the office
of financial management for those funds, accounts, and sources for which the
office of the economic and revenue forecast council does not prepare an
official forecast including estimates of revenues to support financial plans
under RCW 44.40.070, that are prepared by the office of financial management in
consultation with the transportation revenue forecast council.

(21) "Estimated
receipts" means the estimated receipt of cash in the most recent official
economic and revenue forecast prepared under RCW 82.33.020, and prepared by the
office of financial management for those funds, accounts, and sources for which
the office of the economic and revenue forecast council does not prepare an
official forecast.

(22) "State
budgeting, accounting, and reporting system" means a system that gathers,
maintains, and communicates fiscal information. The system links fiscal
information beginning with development of agency budget requests through
adoption of legislative appropriations to tracking actual receipts and
expenditures against approved plans.

(23) "Allotment of
appropriation" means the agency's statement of proposed expenditures, the
director of financial management's review of that statement, and the placement
of the approved statement into the state budgeting, accounting, and reporting
system.

(24) "Statement of
proposed expenditures" means a plan prepared by each agency that breaks
each appropriation out into monthly detail representing the best estimate of
how the appropriation will be expended.

(25) "Undesignated
fund balance (or deficit)" means unreserved and undesignated current
assets or other resources available for expenditure over and above any current
liabilities which are expected to be incurred by the close of the fiscal
period.

(26) "Internal
audit" means an independent appraisal activity within an agency for the
review of operations as a service to management, including a systematic
examination of accounting and fiscal controls to assure that human and material
resources are guarded against waste, loss, or misuse; and that reliable data
are gathered, maintained, and fairly disclosed in a written report of the audit
findings.

(27) "Performance
verification" means an analysis that (a) verifies the accuracy of data
used by state agencies in quantifying intended results and measuring
performance toward those results, and (b) verifies whether or not the reported
results were achieved.

(28) "Performance
audit" has the same meaning as it is defined in RCW 44.28.005.

Sec. 210. RCW 43.88.090 and 1997 c
372 s 1 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) For purposes of
developing budget proposals to the legislature, the governor shall have the
power, and it shall be the governor's duty, to require from proper agency
officials such detailed estimates and other information in such form and at
such times as the governor shall direct. The estimates for the legislature and
the judiciary shall be transmitted to the governor and shall be included in the
budget without revision. The estimates for state pension contributions shall
be based on the rates provided in chapter 41.45 RCW. Copies of all such
estimates shall be transmitted to the standing committees on ways and means of
the house and senate at the same time as they are filed with the governor and
the office of financial management.

The estimates shall
include statements or tables which indicate, by agency, the state funds which
are required for the receipt of federal matching revenues. The estimates shall
be revised as necessary to reflect legislative enactments and adopted
appropriations and shall be included with the initial biennial allotment
submitted under RCW 43.88.110. The estimates must reflect that the agency
considered any alternatives to reduce costs or improve service delivery identified
in the findings of a performance audit of the agency by the ((joint
legislative audit and review committee)) legislative auditor.
Nothing in this subsection requires performance audit findings to be published
as part of the budget.

(2) Each state agency
shall define its mission and establish measurable goals for achieving desirable
results for those who receive its services and the taxpayers who pay for those
services. Each agency shall also develop clear strategies and timelines to
achieve its goals. This section does not require an agency to develop a new
mission or goals in place of identifiable missions or goals that meet the
intent of this section. The mission and goals of each agency must conform to
statutory direction and limitations.

(3) For the purpose of
assessing program performance, each state agency shall establish program
objectives for each major program in its budget. The objectives must be
consistent with the missions and goals developed under this section. The
objectives must be expressed to the extent practicable in outcome-based,
objective, and measurable form unless an exception to adopt a different
standard is granted by the office of financial management and approved by the
legislative committee on performance review. The office of financial
management shall provide necessary professional and technical assistance to
assist state agencies in the development of strategic plans that include the
mission of the agency and its programs, measurable goals, strategies, and performance
measurement systems.

(4) Each state agency
shall adopt procedures for continuous self-assessment of each program and
activity, using the mission, goals, objectives, and measurements required under
subsections (2) and (3) of this section.

(5) It is the policy of
the legislature that each agency's budget proposals must be directly linked to
the agency's stated mission and program goals and objectives. Consistent with
this policy, agency budget proposals must include integration of performance
measures that allow objective determination of a program's success in achieving
its goals. The office of financial management shall develop a plan to merge
the budget development process with agency performance assessment procedures.
The plan must include a schedule to integrate agency strategic plans and
performance measures into agency budget requests and the governor's budget
proposal over three fiscal biennia. The plan must identify those agencies that
will implement the revised budget process in the 1997-1999 biennium, the
1999-2001 biennium, and the 2001-2003 biennium. In consultation with the
legislative fiscal committees, the office of financial management shall
recommend statutory and procedural modifications to the state's budget,
accounting, and reporting systems to facilitate the performance assessment
procedures and the merger of those procedures with the state budget process.
The plan and recommended statutory and procedural modifications must be
submitted to the legislative fiscal committees by September 30, 1996.

(6) In the year of the
gubernatorial election, the governor shall invite the governor-elect or the
governor-elect's designee to attend all hearings provided in RCW 43.88.100; and
the governor shall furnish the governor-elect or the governor-elect's designee
with such information as will enable the governor-elect or the governor-elect's
designee to gain an understanding of the state's budget requirements. The
governor-elect or the governor-elect's designee may ask such questions during
the hearings and require such information as the governor-elect or the
governor-elect's designee deems necessary and may make recommendations in
connection with any item of the budget which, with the governor-elect's reasons
therefor, shall be presented to the legislature in writing with the budget
document. Copies of all such estimates and other required information shall
also be submitted to the standing committees on ways and means of the house and
senate.

Sec. 211. RCW 43.88.160 and 1998 c
135 s 1 are each amended to read as follows:

This section sets forth
the major fiscal duties and responsibilities of officers and agencies of the
executive branch. The regulations issued by the governor pursuant to this
chapter shall provide for a comprehensive, orderly basis for fiscal management
and control, including efficient accounting and reporting therefor, for the
executive branch of the state government and may include, in addition, such
requirements as will generally promote more efficient public management in the
state.

(1) Governor; director
of financial management. The governor, through the director of financial
management, shall devise and supervise a modern and complete accounting system
for each agency to the end that all revenues, expenditures, receipts,
disbursements, resources, and obligations of the state shall be properly and
systematically accounted for. The accounting system shall include the
development of accurate, timely records and reports of all financial affairs of
the state. The system shall also provide for central accounts in the office of
financial management at the level of detail deemed necessary by the director to
perform central financial management. The director of financial management shall
adopt and periodically update an accounting procedures manual. Any agency
maintaining its own accounting and reporting system shall comply with the
updated accounting procedures manual and the rules of the director adopted
under this chapter. An agency may receive a waiver from complying with this
requirement if the waiver is approved by the director. Waivers expire at the
end of the fiscal biennium for which they are granted. The director shall
forward notice of waivers granted to the appropriate legislative fiscal
committees. The director of financial management may require such financial,
statistical, and other reports as the director deems necessary from all
agencies covering any period.

(2) Except as provided
in chapter 43.88C RCW, the director of financial management is responsible for
quarterly reporting of primary operating budget drivers such as applicable
workloads, caseload estimates, and appropriate unit cost data. These reports
shall be transmitted to the legislative fiscal committees or by electronic
means to the legislative evaluation and accountability program committee.
Quarterly reports shall include actual monthly data and the variance between
actual and estimated data to date. The reports shall also include estimates of
these items for the remainder of the budget period.

(3) The director of
financial management shall report at least annually to the appropriate
legislative committees regarding the status of all appropriated capital
projects, including transportation projects, showing significant cost overruns
or underruns. If funds are shifted from one project to another, the office of
financial management shall also reflect this in the annual variance report.
Once a project is complete, the report shall provide a final summary showing
estimated start and completion dates of each project phase compared to actual
dates, estimated costs of each project phase compared to actual costs, and
whether or not there are any outstanding liabilities or unsettled claims at the
time of completion.

(4) In addition, the
director of financial management, as agent of the governor, shall:

(a) Develop and
maintain a system of internal controls and internal audits comprising methods
and procedures to be adopted by each agency that will safeguard its assets,
check the accuracy and reliability of its accounting data, promote operational
efficiency, and encourage adherence to prescribed managerial policies for
accounting and financial controls. The system developed by the director shall
include criteria for determining the scope and comprehensiveness of internal
controls required by classes of agencies, depending on the level of resources
at risk.

Each agency head or
authorized designee shall be assigned the responsibility and authority for
establishing and maintaining internal audits following the standards of
internal auditing of the institute of internal auditors;

(b) Make surveys and
analyses of agencies with the object of determining better methods and
increased effectiveness in the use of manpower and materials; and the director
shall authorize expenditures for employee training to the end that the state
may benefit from training facilities made available to state employees;

(c) Establish policies
for allowing the contracting of child care services;

(d) Report to the
governor with regard to duplication of effort or lack of coordination among
agencies;

(e) Review any pay and
classification plans, and changes thereunder, developed by any agency for their
fiscal impact: PROVIDED, That none of the provisions of this subsection shall
affect merit systems of personnel management now existing or hereafter
established by statute relating to the fixing of qualifications requirements
for recruitment, appointment, or promotion of employees of any agency. The
director shall advise and confer with agencies including appropriate standing
committees of the legislature as may be designated by the speaker of the house
and the president of the senate regarding the fiscal impact of such plans and
may amend or alter said plans, except that for the following agencies no
amendment or alteration of said plans may be made without the approval of the
agency concerned: Agencies headed by elective officials;

(f) Fix the number and
classes of positions or authorized man years of employment for each agency and
during the fiscal period amend the determinations previously fixed by the
director except that the director shall not be empowered to fix said number or
said classes for the following: Agencies headed by elective officials;

(g) Adopt rules to
effectuate provisions contained in (a) through (f) of this subsection.

(5) The treasurer
shall:

(a) Receive, keep, and
disburse all public funds of the state not expressly required by law to be
received, kept, and disbursed by some other persons: PROVIDED, That this
subsection shall not apply to those public funds of the institutions of higher
learning which are not subject to appropriation;

(b) Receive, disburse,
or transfer public funds under the treasurer's supervision or custody;

(c) Keep a correct and
current account of all moneys received and disbursed by the treasurer,
classified by fund or account;

(d) Coordinate
agencies' acceptance and use of credit cards and other payment methods, if the
agencies have received authorization under RCW 43.41.180;

(e) Perform such other
duties as may be required by law or by regulations issued pursuant to this law.

It shall be unlawful
for the treasurer to disburse public funds in the treasury except upon forms or
by alternative means duly prescribed by the director of financial management.
These forms or alternative means shall provide for authentication and
certification by the agency head or the agency head's designee that the
services have been rendered or the materials have been furnished; or, in the
case of loans or grants, that the loans or grants are authorized by law; or, in
the case of payments for periodic maintenance services to be performed on state
owned equipment, that a written contract for such periodic maintenance services
is currently in effect and copies thereof are on file with the office of
financial management; and the treasurer shall not be liable under the
treasurer's surety bond for erroneous or improper payments so made. When
services are lawfully paid for in advance of full performance by any private
individual or business entity other than as provided for by RCW 42.24.035, such
individual or entity other than central stores rendering such services shall
make a cash deposit or furnish surety bond coverage to the state as shall be
fixed in an amount by law, or if not fixed by law, then in such amounts as
shall be fixed by the director of the department of general administration but
in no case shall such required cash deposit or surety bond be less than an amount
which will fully indemnify the state against any and all losses on account of
breach of promise to fully perform such services. No payments shall be made in
advance for any equipment maintenance services to be performed more than three
months after such payment. Any such bond so furnished shall be conditioned
that the person, firm or corporation receiving the advance payment will apply
it toward performance of the contract. The responsibility for recovery of
erroneous or improper payments made under this section shall lie with the
agency head or the agency head's designee in accordance with regulations issued
pursuant to this chapter. Nothing in this section shall be construed to permit
a public body to advance funds to a private service provider pursuant to a
grant or loan before services have been rendered or material furnished.

(6) The state auditor
shall:

(a) Report to the
legislature the results of current post audits that have been made of the
financial transactions of each agency; to this end the state auditor
may, in the state auditor's discretion, examine the books and accounts
of any agency, official, or employee charged with the receipt, custody, or
safekeeping of public funds. Where feasible in conducting examinations, the state
auditor shall utilize data and findings from the internal control system
prescribed by the office of financial management. The current post audit of
each agency may include a section on recommendations to the legislature as
provided in (c) of this subsection.

(b) Give information to
the legislature, whenever required, upon any subject relating to the financial
affairs of the state.

(c) Make the state
auditor's official report on or before the thirty-first of December which
precedes the meeting of the legislature. The report shall be for the last
complete fiscal period and shall include determinations as to whether agencies,
in making expenditures, complied with the laws of this state. The state
auditor is authorized to perform or participate in performance verifications
and performance audits as expressly authorized by the legislature in the
omnibus biennial appropriations acts or in the performance audit work plan
approved by the ((joint legislative audit and review committee)) members
of the performance audit office. The state auditor, upon completing an
audit for legal and financial compliance under chapter 43.09 RCW or a
performance verification, may report to the ((joint legislative audit and
review committee)) legislative auditor or ((other))
appropriate committees of the legislature, in a manner prescribed by the ((joint
legislative audit and review committee)) legislative auditor, on
facts relating to the management or performance of governmental programs where
such facts are discovered incidental to the legal and financial audit or
performance verification. The state auditor may make such a report to the
legislative auditor or a legislative committee only if the state
auditor has determined that the agency has been given an opportunity and has
failed to resolve the management or performance issues raised by the state
auditor. If the state auditor makes a report to the legislative
auditor or a legislative committee, the agency may submit to the legislative
auditor or committee a response to the report. This subsection (6) shall
not be construed to authorize the state auditor to allocate other than
de minimis resources to performance audits except as expressly authorized in
the appropriations acts or in the performance audit work plan. The results of
a performance audit conducted by the state auditor that has been requested by
the ((joint legislative audit and review committee)) legislative
auditor must only be transmitted to the ((joint legislative audit and
review committee)) legislative auditor.

(d) Be empowered to
take exception to specific expenditures that have been incurred by any agency
or to take exception to other practices related in any way to the agency's
financial transactions and to cause such exceptions to be made a matter of
public record, including disclosure to the agency concerned and to the director
of financial management. It shall be the duty of the director of financial
management to cause corrective action to be taken within six months, such
action to include, as appropriate, the withholding of funds as provided in RCW
43.88.110. The director of financial management shall annually report by
December 31st the status of audit resolution to the appropriate committees of
the legislature, the state auditor, and the attorney general. The director of
financial management shall include in the audit resolution report actions taken
as a result of an audit including, but not limited to, types of personnel
actions, costs and types of litigation, and value of recouped goods or
services.

(e) Promptly report any
irregularities to the attorney general.

(f) Investigate
improper governmental activity under chapter 42.40 RCW.

(7) The ((joint
legislative audit and review committee)) legislative auditor may:

(a) Make post audits of
the financial transactions of any agency and management surveys and program
reviews as provided for in chapter 44.28 RCW as well as performance audits and
program evaluations. To this end the ((joint committee)) legislative
auditor may in ((its)) the legislative auditor's discretion
examine the books, accounts, and other records of any agency, official, or
employee.

(b) Give information to
the legislature or any legislative committee whenever required upon any subject
relating to the performance and management of state agencies.

(c) Make a report to
the legislature which shall include at least the following:

(i) Determinations as
to the extent to which agencies in making expenditures have complied with the
will of the legislature and in this connection, may take exception to specific
expenditures or financial practices of any agencies; and

(ii) Such plans as ((it))
the legislative auditor deems expedient for the support of the state's
credit, for lessening expenditures, for promoting frugality and economy in
agency affairs, and generally for an improved level of fiscal management.

Sec. 212. RCW 43.88.205 and 1996 c
288 s 39 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) Whenever an agency
makes application, enters into a contract or agreement, or submits state plans
for participation in, and for grants of federal funds under any federal law,
the agency making such application shall at the time of such action, give
notice in such form and manner as the director of financial management may
prescribe, or the ((chair of the joint legislative audit and review
committee)) legislative auditor, standing committees on ways and
means of the house and senate, the chief clerk of the house, or the secretary
of the senate may request.

(2) Whenever any such
application, contract, agreement, or state plan is amended, such agency shall
notify each such officer of such action in the same manner as prescribed or
requested pursuant to subsection (1) of this section.

(3) Such agency shall
promptly furnish such progress reports in relation to each such application,
contract, agreement, or state plan as may be requested following the date of
the filing of the application, contract, agreement, or state plan; and shall
also file with each such officer a final report as to the final disposition of
each such application, contract, agreement, or state plan if such is requested.

Sec. 213. RCW 43.88.230 and 1996 c
288 s 40 are each amended to read as follows:

For the purposes of
this chapter, the statute law committee, the ((joint legislative audit and
review committee)) legislative auditor, the legislative
transportation committee, the legislative evaluation and accountability program
committee, the office of state actuary, and all legislative standing committees
of both houses shall be deemed a part of the legislative branch of state
government.

Sec. 214. RCW 43.88.310 and 1996 c
288 s 41 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) The legislative
auditor ((of the office of the joint legislative audit and review committee,
with the concurrence of the joint legislative audit and review committee,))
may file with the attorney general any audit exceptions or other findings of
any performance audit, management study, or special report prepared for the ((joint
legislative audit and review committee)) legislative auditor, any
standing or special committees of the house or senate, or the entire
legislature which indicate a violation of RCW 43.88.290, or any other act of
malfeasance, misfeasance, or nonfeasance on the part of any state officer or
employee.

(2) The attorney
general shall promptly review each filing received from the legislative auditor
and may act thereon as provided in RCW 43.88.300, or any other applicable
statute authorizing enforcement proceedings by the attorney general. The
attorney general shall advise the ((joint legislative audit and review
committee)) legislative auditor of the status of exceptions or
findings referred under this section.

Sec. 215. RCW 43.88.510 and 1996 c
288 s 42 are each amended to read as follows:

Not later than ninety
days after the beginning of each biennium, the director of financial management
shall submit the compiled list of boards, commissions, councils, and
committees, together with the information on each such group, that is required
by RCW 43.88.505 to:

(1) The speaker of the
house and the president of the senate for distribution to the appropriate
standing committees, including one copy to the staff of each of the committees;

(2) The ((chair of
the joint legislative audit and review committee, including a copy to the staff
of the committee)) legislative auditor;

(3) The chairs of the
committees on ways and means of the senate and house of representatives; and

(4) Members of the
state government committee of the house of representatives and of the
governmental operations committee of the senate, including one copy to the
staff of each of the committees.

Sec. 216. RCW 43.131.051 and 2000
c 189 s 4 are each amended to read as follows:

The ((joint
legislative audit and review committee)) legislative auditor shall
conduct a program and fiscal review of any entity scheduled for termination
under this chapter. This program and fiscal review shall be completed and a
preliminary report prepared during the calendar year prior to the date
established for termination. These reports shall be prepared in the manner set
forth in RCW 44.28.071 and 44.28.075. Upon completion of its preliminary
report, the ((joint legislative audit and review committee)) legislative
auditor shall transmit copies of the report to the office of financial
management and any affected entity. The final report shall include the
response, if any, of the affected entity and the office of financial management
in the same manner as set forth in RCW 44.28.088, except the affected entity
and the office of financial management shall have sixty days to respond to the
report. The ((joint legislative audit and review committee)) legislative
auditor shall transmit the final report to the legislature, to the state
entity affected, to the governor, and to the state library.

Sec. 217. RCW 43.131.061 and 2000
c 189 s 5 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) Any entity may be
scheduled for sunset termination and review under this chapter by law.

(2) An entity scheduled
for sunset termination shall establish performance measures, as required under
subsection (3) of this section, and must be evaluated, in part, in terms of the
results. The entity has the burden of demonstrating the extent to which
performance results have been achieved. The sunset termination legislation
shall name a lead entity, if more than one entity is impacted by scheduled
termination. The affected entity or lead entity has the responsibility for
developing and implementing a data collection plan and submitting the resulting
performance information to the ((joint legislative audit and review
committee)) legislative auditor.

(3) An entity shall
develop performance measures and a data collection plan and submit them for
review and comment to the ((joint legislative audit and review committee))
legislative auditor within one year of the effective date of the
legislation establishing the sunset termination.

(4) Unless specified
otherwise, sunset terminations under this chapter shall be a minimum of seven
years. The ((joint legislative audit and review committee)) legislative
auditor shall complete its review in the year prior to the date of
termination.

Sec. 218. RCW 43.131.071 and 2000 c
189 s 6 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) In conducting the
review of an entity, the ((joint legislative audit and review committee))
legislative auditor shall determine the scope and objectives of the
review and consider, but not be limited to, the following factors, if
applicable:

(a) The extent to which
the entity has complied with legislative intent;

(b) The extent to which
the entity is operating in an efficient and economical manner which results in
optimum performance;

(c) The extent to which
the entity is operating in the public interest by controlling costs;

(d) The extent to which
the entity duplicates the activities of other entities or of the private
sector;

(e) The extent to which
the entity is meeting the performance measures developed under RCW 43.131.061;
and

(f) The possible impact
of the termination or modification of the entity.

(2) After
completing the review under subsection (1) of this section, the ((committee))
legislative auditor shall make its recommendations to the legislature.

Sec. 219. RCW 43.131.110 and 1996
c 288 s 47 are each amended to read as follows:

Any reference in this
chapter to a committee of the legislature ((including the joint legislative
audit and review committee)) shall also refer to the successor of that
committee.

Sec. 220. RCW 43.250.080 and 1996
c 288 s 48 are each amended to read as follows:

At the end of each
fiscal year, the state treasurer shall submit to the governor, the state
auditor, and the ((joint legislative audit and review committee)) legislative
auditor a summary of the activity of the investment pool. The summary
shall indicate the quantity of funds deposited; the earnings of the pool; the
investments purchased, sold, or exchanged; the administrative expenses of the
investment pool; and such other information as the state treasurer deems
relevant.

Sec. 221. RCW 44.40.025 and 1996 c
288 s 49 are each amended to read as follows:

In addition to the
powers and duties authorized in RCW 44.40.020, the committee and the standing
committees on transportation of the house and senate shall, in coordination
with the ((joint legislative audit and review committee)) legislative
auditor, the legislative evaluation and accountability program committee,
and the ways and means committees of the senate and house of representatives,
ascertain, study, and/or analyze all available facts and matters relating or
pertaining to sources of revenue, appropriations, expenditures, and financial
condition of the motor vehicle fund and accounts thereof, the highway safety
fund, and all other funds or accounts related to transportation programs of the
state.

The ((joint
legislative audit and review committee)) legislative auditor, the
legislative evaluation and accountability program committee, and the ways and
means committees of the senate and house of representatives shall coordinate
their activities with the legislative transportation committee in carrying out
the committees' powers and duties under chapter 43.88 RCW in matters relating
to the transportation programs of the state.

Sec. 222. RCW 67.70.310 and 1996 c
288 s 50 are each amended to read as follows:

The director of financial
management may conduct a management review of the commission's lottery
operations to assure that:

(1) The manner and time
of payment of prizes to the holder of winning tickets or shares is consistent
with this chapter and the rules adopted under this chapter;

(2) The apportionment
of total revenues accruing from the sale of lottery tickets or shares and from
all other sources is consistent with this chapter;

(3) The manner and type
of lottery being conducted, and the expenses incidental thereto, are the most
efficient and cost‑effective; and

(4) The commission is
not unnecessarily incurring operating and administrative costs.

In conducting a
management review, the director of financial management may inspect the books,
documents, and records of the commission. Upon completion of a management
review, all irregularities shall be reported to the attorney general, the ((joint
legislative audit and review committee)) legislative auditor, and
the state auditor. The director of financial management shall make such
recommendations as may be necessary for the most efficient and cost-effective
operation of the lottery.

Sec. 223. RCW 74.09.415 and 1998 c
245 s 144 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) There is hereby
established a program to be known as the children's health program.

To the extent of
available funds:

(a) Health care
services may be provided to persons who are under eighteen years of age with
household incomes at or below the federal poverty level and not otherwise
eligible for medical assistance or the limited casualty program for the
medically needy.

(b) The determination
of eligibility of recipients for health care services shall be the responsibility
of the department. The application process shall be easy to understand and, to
the extent possible, applications shall be made available at local schools and
other appropriate locations. The department shall make eligibility
determinations within the timeframes for establishing eligibility for children
on medical assistance, as defined by RCW 74.09.510.

(c) The amount, scope,
and duration of health care services provided to eligible children under the
children's health program shall be the same as that provided to children under
medical assistance, as defined in RCW 74.09.520.

(2) The legislature is
interested in assessing the effectiveness of the prenatal care program.
However, the legislature recognizes the cost and complexity associated with
such assessment.

The legislature accepts
the effectiveness of prenatal and maternity care at improving birth outcomes
when these services are received by eligible persons. Therefore, the
legislature intends to focus scarce assessment resources to determine the
extent to which support services such as child care, psychosocial and
nutritional assessment and counseling, case management, transportation, and
other support services authorized by chapter 296, Laws of 1990, result in
receipt of prenatal and maternity care by eligible persons.

The University of
Washington shall conduct a study, based on a statistically significant
statewide sampling of data, to evaluate the effectiveness of the maternity care
access program set forth in RCW 74.09.760 through 74.09.820 based on the
principles set forth in RCW 74.09.770.

The University of
Washington shall develop a plan and budget for the study in consultation with
the ((joint legislative audit and review committee)) legislative
auditor. The ((joint legislative audit and review committee)) legislative
auditor shall also monitor the progress of the study.

The department of
social and health services shall make data and other information available as
needed to the University of Washington as required to conduct this study.

The study shall
determine:

(a) The characteristics
of women receiving services, including health risk factors;

(b) The extent to which
access to maternity care and support services have improved in this state as a
result of this program;

(c) The utilization of
services and birth outcomes for women and infants served by this program by
type of practitioner;

(d) The extent to which
birth outcomes for women receiving services under this program have improved in
comparison to birth outcomes of nonmedicaid mothers;

(e) The impact of
increased medicaid reimbursement to physicians on provider participation;

(f) The difference
between costs for services provided under this program and medicaid
reimbursement for the services;

(g) The gaps in services,
if any, that may still exist for women and their infants as defined by RCW
74.09.790 (1) and (4) served by this program, excluding pregnant substance
abusers, and women covered by private health insurance; and

(h) The
number and mix of services provided to eligible women as defined by subsection
(2)(g) of this section and the effect on birth outcomes as compared to
nonmedicaid birth outcomes.

Sec. 224. RCW 79.01.006 and 1996 c
288 s 51 and 1996 c 261 s 1 are each reenacted and amended to read as follows:

(1) Every five years
the department of social and health services and other state agencies that
operate institutions shall conduct an inventory of all real property subject to
the charitable, educational, penal, and reformatory institution account and
other real property acquired for institutional purposes or for the benefit of
the blind, deaf, mentally ill, developmentally disabled, or otherwise disabled.
The inventory shall identify which of those real properties are not needed for
state-provided residential care, custody, or treatment. By December 1, 1992,
and every five years thereafter the department shall report the results of the
inventory to the house of representatives committee on capital facilities and
financing, the senate committee on ways and means, and the ((joint
legislative audit and review committee)) legislative auditor.

(2) Real property
identified as not needed for state-provided residential care, custody, or
treatment shall be transferred to the corpus of the charitable, educational,
penal, and reformatory institution account. This subsection shall not apply to
leases of real property to a consortium of three or more counties in order for
the counties to construct or otherwise acquire correctional facilities for
juveniles or adults or to real property subject to binding conditions that
conflict with the other provisions of this subsection.

(3) The department of
natural resources shall manage all property subject to the charitable,
educational, penal, and reformatory institution account and, in consultation
with the department of social and health services and other affected agencies,
shall adopt a plan for the management of real property subject to the account
and other real property acquired for institutional purposes or for the benefit
of the blind, deaf, mentally ill, developmentally disabled, or otherwise
disabled.

(a) The plan shall be
consistent with state trust land policies and shall be compatible with the
needs of institutions adjacent to real property subject to the plan.

(b) The plan may be
modified as necessary to ensure the quality of future management and to address
the acquisition of additional real property.

PART III - OTHER

NEW SECTION. Sec.
301. RCW 43.21J.800 (Joint legislative audit
and review committee report) and 1996 c 288 s 36 & 1993 c 516 s 11 are each
repealed.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
302. Part headings used in
this act are not part of the law.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
303. (1) Section 201 of this
act expires September 1, 2001.

(2)
Sections 216 through 219 of this act expire June 30, 2015.

---
END ---