BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF
WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec.
1. A new section is added
to chapter 29.71 RCW to read as follows:

(1) A number of
presidential electors is allocated to each set of candidates for president and
vice-president of the United States corresponding with the proportional share
of the total statewide popular vote it received for president and
vice-president.

(2) The final
allocation of presidential electors must be in whole numbers and is made as
follows:

(a) First, the total
number of votes cast for each set of candidates is divided by the total number
of votes cast for president and vice-president in the state and multiplied by
the number of presidential electors allotted to the state of Washington,
rounding these numbers to the nearest whole numbers.

(b) Second, the final
allocation of presidential electors among the sets of candidates is the same as
these whole numbers, if the sum of the whole numbers equals the number of
presidential electors allotted to the state of Washington.

(c) Third, if the sum
of the whole numbers is less than the total number of presidential electors
allocated to the state, then the presidential electors allocated to the set of
candidates with the highest fractional value in its calculation, that was not
rounded up to the next highest whole number, is increased by one. The final
allocation of presidential electors is the same as the whole numbers specified
under (a) of this subsection as adjusted under this subsection (2)(c).

(d) Fourth, if the sum
of the whole numbers is greater than the total number of presidential electors
allocated to the state, then the presidential electors allocated to the set of
presidential candidates that was rounded up to a higher whole number, with the
lowest fractional value causing this rounding upward, is reduced by one. The
final allocation of presidential electors is the same as the whole numbers
specified under (a) of this subsection as adjusted under this subsection
(2)(d).

(e) Fifth,
if two or more sets of presidential candidates received the identical total
number of votes cast for those offices and the adjustments under (c) and (d) of
this subsection are necessary for these sets of candidates, the secretary of
state shall determine by lot which of these sets of candidates will have its
whole number adjusted under (c) or (d) of this subsection. The final
allocation of presidential electors is the same as the whole numbers specified
under (a) of this subsection, as adjusted under (c) or (d) of this subsection
for this set of candidates.

--- END ---