BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF
WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec.
1. A new section is added
to chapter 46.04 RCW to read as follows:

"High occupancy
vehicle" means:

(1) A rubber tired
municipal transit vehicle;

(2) A bus with a
carrying capacity of at least sixteen persons, including the driver;

(3) A motorcycle;

(4) A motor home with
at least the number of occupants specified on applicable highway signs;

(5) A tow truck,
regardless of weight or number of occupants, when en route to an emergency on a
specific roadway or roadside; and

(6) Any other vehicle
with at least the number of occupants specified on applicable highway signs,
other than a truck over twenty thousand pounds gross vehicle weight.

Sec. 2. RCW 46.61.165 and 1999 c
206 s 1 are each amended to read as follows:

The state department of
transportation and the local authorities are authorized to reserve all or any
portion of any highway under their respective jurisdictions, including any
designated lane or ramp, for the exclusive or preferential use of ((public
transportation vehicles or private motor vehicles carrying no fewer than a
specified number of passengers)) high occupancy vehicles when such
limitation will increase the efficient utilization of the highway or will aid
in the conservation of energy resources. Regulations authorizing such
exclusive or preferential use of a highway facility may be declared to be
effective at all times or at specified times of day or on specified days.
Violation of a restriction of highway usage prescribed by the appropriate
authority under this section is a traffic infraction.

Sec. 3. RCW 47.52.025 and 1974
ex.s. c 133 s 1 are each amended to read as follows:

Highway
authorities of the state, counties, and incorporated cities and towns, in
addition to the specific powers granted in this chapter, shall also have, and
may exercise, relative to limited access facilities, any and all additional
authority, now or hereafter vested in them relative to highways or streets
within their respective jurisdictions, and may regulate, restrict, or prohibit
the use of such limited access facilities by various classes of vehicles or
traffic. Such highway authorities may reserve any limited access facility or
portions thereof, including designated lanes or ramps for the exclusive or
preferential use of ((public transportation vehicles, privately owned buses,
or private motor vehicles carrying not less than a specified number of
passengers)) high occupancy vehicles as defined in section 1 of this act
when such limitation will increase the efficient utilization of the highway
facility or will aid in the conservation of energy resources. Regulations
authorizing such exclusive or preferential use of a highway facility may be
declared to be effective at all time or at specified times of day or on
specified days.

---
END ---