BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF
WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1. RCW 50.20.120 and 1993 c
483 s 12 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) Subject to the
other provisions of this title, benefits shall be payable to any eligible
individual during the individual's benefit year in a maximum amount equal to
the lesser of ((thirty)) twenty-seven times the weekly benefit
amount (determined hereinafter) or one-third of the individual's base year
wages under this title: PROVIDED, That as to any week beginning on and after
March 31, 1981, which falls in an extended benefit period as defined in RCW
50.22.010(1), as now or hereafter amended, an individual's eligibility for
maximum benefits in excess of twenty-six times his or her weekly benefit amount
will be subject to the terms and conditions set forth in RCW 50.22.020, as now
or hereafter amended.

(2) An individual's
weekly benefit amount shall be an amount equal to one ((twenty-fifth of the
average quarterly wages of the individual's total wages during the two quarters
of)) percent of the total wages paid in the individual's base year
((in which such total wages were highest)). The maximum and minimum
amounts payable weekly shall be determined as of each June 30th to apply to benefit
years beginning in the twelve-month period immediately following such June
30th. The maximum amount payable weekly shall be seventy percent of the
"average weekly wage" for the calendar year preceding such June
30th. The minimum amount payable weekly shall be fifteen percent of the
"average weekly wage" for the calendar year preceding such June
30th. If any weekly benefit, maximum benefit, or minimum benefit amount
computed herein is not a multiple of one dollar, it shall be reduced to the
next lower multiple of one dollar.

Sec. 2. RCW 50.29.025 and 2000 c
2 s 4 are each amended to read as follows:

The contribution rate
for each employer subject to contributions under RCW 50.24.010 shall be
determined under this section.

(1) A fund balance
ratio shall be determined by dividing the balance in the unemployment
compensation fund as of the September 30th immediately preceding the rate year
by the total remuneration paid by all employers subject to contributions during
the second calendar year preceding the rate year and reported to the department
by the following March 31st. The division shall be carried to the fourth
decimal place with the remaining fraction, if any, disregarded. The fund
balance ratio shall be expressed as a percentage.

(2) The interval of the
fund balance ratio, expressed as a percentage, shall determine which tax
schedule in subsection (5) of this section shall be in effect for assigning tax
rates for the rate year. The intervals for determining the effective tax
schedule shall be:

Interval
of the

Fund
Balance Ratio Effective

Expressed
as a Percentage Tax Schedule

2.90
and above AA

2.10 to 2.89 A

1.70 to 2.09 B

1.40 to 1.69 C

1.00
to 1.39 D

0.70
to 0.99 E

Less than 0.70 F

(3) An array shall be
prepared, listing all qualified employers in ascending order of their benefit
ratios. The array shall show for each qualified employer: (a) Identification
number; (b) benefit ratio; (c) taxable payrolls for the four calendar quarters
immediately preceding the computation date and reported to the department by
the cut-off date; (d) a cumulative total of taxable payrolls consisting of the
employer's taxable payroll plus the taxable payrolls of all other employers
preceding him or her in the array; and (e) the percentage equivalent of the
cumulative total of taxable payrolls.

(4) Each employer in
the array shall be assigned to one of twenty rate classes according to the
percentage intervals of cumulative taxable payrolls set forth in subsection (5)
of this section: PROVIDED, That if an employer's taxable payroll falls within
two or more rate classes, the employer and any other employer with the same
benefit ratio shall be assigned to the lowest rate class which includes any
portion of the employer's taxable payroll.

(5) Except as provided
in RCW 50.29.026, the contribution rate for each employer in the array shall be
the rate specified in the following tables for the rate class to which he or
she has been assigned, as determined under subsection (4) of this section,
within the tax schedule which is to be in effect during the rate year:

((Percent of

Cumulative Schedules of Contributions
Rates

Taxable Payrolls for Effective Tax Schedule

Rate

From To Class AA A B C D E F

0.00 5.00 1 0.47 0.47 0.57 0.97 1.47 1.87 2.47

5.01 10.00 2 0.47 0.47 0.77 1.17 1.67 2.07 2.67

10.01 15.00 3 0.57 0.57 0.97 1.37 1.77 2.27 2.87

15.01 20.00 4 0.57 0.73 1.11 1.51 1.90 2.40 2.98

20.01 25.00 5 0.72 0.92 1.30 1.70 2.09 2.59 3.08

25.01 30.00 6 0.91 1.11 1.49 1.89 2.29 2.69 3.18

30.01 35.00 7 1.00 1.29 1.69 2.08 2.48 2.88 3.27

35.01 40.00 8 1.19 1.48 1.88 2.27 2.67 3.07 3.47

40.01 45.00 9 1.37 1.67 2.07 2.47 2.87 3.27 3.66

45.01 50.00 10 1.56 1.86 2.26 2.66 3.06 3.46 3.86

50.01 55.00 11 1.84 2.14 2.45 2.85 3.25 3.66 3.95

55.01 60.00 12 2.03 2.33 2.64 3.04 3.44 3.85 4.15

60.01 65.00 13 2.22 2.52 2.83 3.23 3.64 4.04 4.34

65.01 70.00 14 2.40 2.71 3.02 3.43 3.83 4.24 4.54

70.01 75.00 15 2.68 2.90 3.21 3.62 4.02 4.43 4.63

75.01 80.00 16 2.87 3.09 3.69 3.81 4.22 4.53 4.73

80.01 85.00 17 3.27 3.47 3.77 4.17 4.57 4.87 4.97

85.01 90.00 18 3.67 3.87 4.17 4.57 4.87 4.97 5.17

90.01 95.00 19 4.07 4.27 4.57 4.97 5.07 5.17 5.37

95.01 100.00 20 5.40 5.40 5.40 5.40 5.40 5.40 5.40))

Percent of

Cumulative Schedules of
Contributions Rates

Taxable Payrolls for Effective Tax
Schedule

Rate

From To Class AA A B C D E F

0.00 5.00 1 0.47 0.47 0.57 0.97 1.47 1.87 2.47

5.01 10.00 2 0.47 0.47 0.77 1.17 1.67 2.07 2.67

10.01 15.00 3 0.57 0.57 0.97 1.37 1.77 2.27 2.87

15.01 20.00 4 0.57 0.73 1.11 1.51 1.90 2.40 2.98

20.01 25.00 5 0.72 0.92 1.30 1.70 2.09 2.59 3.08

25.01 30.00 6 0.79 1.00 1.40 1.80 2.22 2.68 3.17

30.01 35.00 7 0.86 1.09 1.50 1.91 2.35 2.81 3.26

35.01 40.00 8 0.95 1.19 1.61 2.02 2.49 2.95 3.39

40.01 45.00 9 1.04 1.30 1.74 2.15 2.64 3.10 3.53

45.01 50.00 10 1.13 1.42 1.87 2.27 2.80 3.26 3.67

50.01 55.00 11 1.24 1.54 2.01 2.41 2.96 3.42 3.81

55.01 60.00 12 1.36 1.68 2.16 2.56 3.14 3.59 3.97

60.01 65.00 13 1.49 1.83 2.32 2.71 3.33 3.77 4.12

65.01 70.00 14 1.63 2.00 2.49 2.87 3.53 3.96 4.29

70.01 75.00 15 1.78 2.18 2.68 3.04 3.74 4.16 4.46

75.01 80.00 16 1.95 2.37 2.88 3.23 3.97 4.37 4.64

80.01 85.00 17 2.14 2.59 3.10 3.42 4.21 4.58 4.83

85.01 90.00 18 2.34 2.82 3.33 3.63 4.46 4.81 5.02

90.01 95.00 19 4.48 4.70 5.03 5.47 5.58 5.69 5.91

95.01 100.00 20 6.57 6.57 6.57 6.57 6.57 6.57 6.57

(6) The contribution
rate for each employer not qualified to be in the array shall be as follows:

(a) Employers who do
not meet the definition of "qualified employer" by reason of failure
to pay contributions when due shall be assigned a contribution rate two-tenths
higher than that in rate class 20 for the applicable rate year, except employers
who have an approved agency-deferred payment contract by September 30 of the
previous rate year. If any employer with an approved agency-deferred payment
contract fails to make any one of the succeeding deferred payments or fails to
submit any succeeding tax report and payment in a timely manner, the employer's
tax rate shall immediately revert to a contribution rate two-tenths higher than
that in rate class 20 for the applicable rate year; and

(b) For all other
employers not qualified to be in the array, the contribution rate shall be a
rate equal to the average industry rate as determined by the commissioner;
however, the rate may not be less than one percent. Assignment of employers by
the commissioner to industrial classification, for purposes of this section,
shall be in accordance with established classification practices found in the
"Standard Industrial Classification Manual" issued by the federal
office of management and budget to the third digit provided in the standard
industrial classification code, or in the North American industry
classification system code.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
3. If any part of this act
is found to be in conflict with federal requirements that are a prescribed
condition to the allocation of federal funds to the state or the eligibility of
employers in this state for federal unemployment tax credits, the conflicting
part of this act is inoperative solely to the extent of the conflict, and the
finding or determination does not affect the operation of the remainder of this
act. Rules adopted under this act must meet federal requirements that are a
necessary condition to the receipt of federal funds by the state or the
granting of federal unemployment tax credits to employers in this state.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
4. (1) Section 1 of this act
applies beginning with weeks of unemployment that begin on or after January 6,
2002.

(2)
Section 2 of this act applies beginning with rate years that begin on or after
January 1, 2002.

---
END ---