BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF
WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec.
1. A new section is added
to chapter 80.28 RCW to read as follows:

Upon request by an
electrical company, the commission may approve a tariff for irrigation pumping
service that allows the company to buy back electricity from customers to
reduce electricity usage by those customers during the electrical company's
particular irrigation season.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
2. A new section is added
to chapter 54.16 RCW to read as follows:

The commission may
approve a tariff for irrigation pumping service that allows the district to buy
back electricity from customers to reduce electricity usage by those customers
during the district's particular irrigation season.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
3. A new section is added
to chapter 35.92 RCW to read as follows:

The council or board
may approve a tariff for irrigation pumping service that allows the municipal
utility to buy back electricity from customers to reduce electricity usage by
those customers during the municipal utility's particular irrigation season.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
4. A new section is added
to chapter 23.86 RCW to read as follows:

The board may approve a
tariff for irrigation pumping service that allows the locally regulated utility
to buy back electricity from customers to reduce electricity usage by those
customers during the locally regulated utility's particular irrigation season.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
5. A new section is added
to chapter 24.06 RCW to read as follows:

The board may approve a
tariff for irrigation pumping service that allows the locally regulated utility
to buy back electricity from customers to reduce electricity usage by those
customers during the locally regulated utility's particular irrigation season.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
6. A new section is added
to chapter 87.03 RCW to read as follows:

The board may approve a
tariff for irrigation pumping service that allows the irrigation district to
buy back electricity from customers to reduce electricity usage by those
customers during the irrigation district's particular irrigation season.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 7. This act is necessary for
the immediate preservation of the public peace, health, or safety, or support
of the state government and its existing public institutions, and takes effect
immediately.

---
END ---