BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF
WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec.
1. The legislature finds and
declares:

(1) Teacher
qualifications and effectiveness are the most important influences on student
learning in schools.

(2) Preparation of
individuals to become well-qualified, effective teachers must be high quality.

(3) Teachers who
complete high-quality alternative route programs with intensive field-based
experience, adequate coursework, and strong mentorship do as well or better
than teachers who complete traditional preparation programs.

(4) High-quality
alternative route programs can provide more flexibility and expedience for
individuals to transition from their current career to teaching.

(5) High-quality
alternative route programs can help school districts fill subject matter
shortage areas and areas with shortages due to geographic location.

(6) Regardless of
route, all candidates for residency teacher certification must meet the high
standards required by the state.

The legislature
recognizes widespread concerns about the potential for teacher shortages and
finds that classified instructional staff in public schools represent a great
untapped resource for recruiting the teachers of the future.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
2. There is hereby created a
statewide partnership grant program to provide new high-quality alternative
routes to residency teacher certification. To the extent funds are
appropriated for this specific purpose, funds provided under this partnership
grant program shall be used solely for school districts, or consortia of school
districts, to partner with state-approved higher education teacher preparation
programs to provide one or more of three alternative route programs in section
5 of this act, aimed at recruiting candidates to teaching in subject matter
shortage areas and areas with shortages due to geographic location. Districts,
or consortia of districts, may also include their educational service districts
in their partnership grant program. Partnership programs receiving grants may
enroll candidates as early as January 2002.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
3. (1) Each district or
consortia of school districts applying for state funds through this program
shall submit a proposal to the Washington professional educator standards board
specifying:

(a) The route or routes
the partnership program intends to offer and a detailed description of how the
routes will be structured and operated by the partnership;

(b) The number of
candidates that will be enrolled per route;

(c) An identification,
indication of commitment, and description of the role of approved teacher
preparation programs that are partnering with the district or consortia of
districts;

(d) An assurance of
district provision of adequate training for mentor teachers either through
participation in a state mentor training academy or district-provided training
that meets state-established mentor-training standards specific to the
mentoring of alternative route candidates;

(e) An assurance that
significant time will be provided for mentor teachers to spend with the
alternative route teacher candidates throughout the internship. Partnerships
must provide each candidate with intensive classroom mentoring until such time
as the candidate demonstrates the competency necessary to manage the classroom
with less intensive supervision and guidance from a mentor;

(f) A description of
the rigorous screening process for applicants to alternative route programs,
including entry requirements specific to each route, as provided in section 5
of this act; and

(g) The design and use
of a teacher development plan for each candidate. The plan shall specify the
alternative route coursework and training required of each candidate and shall
be developed by comparing the candidate's prior experience and coursework with
the state's new performance-based standards for residency certification and
adjusting any requirements accordingly. The plan shall include the following
components:

(i) A minimum of
one-half of a school year, and an additional significant amount of time if
necessary, of intensive mentorship, starting with full-time mentoring and
progressing to increasingly less intensive monitoring and assistance as the
intern demonstrates the skills necessary to take over the classroom with less
intensive support;

(ii) Identification of
performance indicators based on the knowledge and skills standards required for
residency certification by the state board of education;

(iii) Identification of
benchmarks that will indicate when the standard is met for all performance indicators;

(iv) A description of
strategies for assessing candidate performance on the benchmarks;

(v) Identification of
one or more tools to be used to assess a candidate's performance once the
candidate has been in the classroom for about one-half of a school year; and

(vi) A description of
the criteria that would result in residency certification after about one-half
of a school year but before the end of the program.

(2) Districts may apply
for program funds to pay stipends to both mentor teachers and interns during
their mentored internship. For both intern stipends and accompanying mentor
stipends, the per intern district request for funds may not exceed the amount
designated by the BA+0 cell on the statewide teacher salary allocation
schedule. This amount shall be prorated for internships and mentorships that
last less than a full school year. Interns in the program for a full year
shall be provided a stipend of at least eighty percent of the amount generated
by the BA+0 cell on the statewide teacher salary allocation schedule. This
amount shall be prorated for internships that last less than a full school
year.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
4. (1) The professional
educator standards board, with support from the office of the superintendent of
public instruction, shall select school districts and consortia of school
districts to receive partnership grants from funds appropriated by the
legislature for this purpose. Factors to be considered in selecting proposals
include:

(a) The degree to which
the district, or consortia of districts in partnership, are currently
experiencing teacher shortages;

(b) The degree to which
the proposal addresses criteria specified in section 3 of this act and is in
keeping with specifications of program routes in section 5 of this act;

(c) The
cost-effectiveness of the proposed program; and

(d) Any demonstrated
district and in-kind contributions to the program.

(2) Selection of
proposals shall also take into consideration the need to ensure an adequate
number of candidates for each type of route in order to evaluate their success.

(3) Funds appropriated
for the partnership grant program in this chapter shall be administered by the
office of the superintendent of public instruction.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
5. Partnership grants funded
under this chapter shall operate one to three specific route programs.
Successful completion of the program shall make a candidate eligible for
residency teacher certification.

(1) Partnership grant
programs seeking funds to operate route one programs shall enroll currently
employed classified instructional employees with transferable associate degrees
seeking residency teacher certification with endorsements in special education
or English as a second language. It is anticipated that candidates enrolled in
this route will complete both their baccalaureate degree and requirements for
residency certification in two years or less, including a mentored internship
to be completed in the final year. In addition, partnership programs shall
uphold entry requirements for candidates that include:

(a) District or
building validation of qualifications, including three years of successful
student interaction and leadership as a classified instructional employee;

(b) Successful passage
of the statewide basic skills exam, when available; and

(c) Meeting the age,
good moral character, and personal fitness requirements adopted by rule for
teachers.

(2) Partnership grant
programs seeking funds to operate route two programs shall enroll currently
employed classified staff with baccalaureate degrees seeking residency teacher
certification in subject matter shortage areas and areas with shortages due to
geographic location. Candidates enrolled in this route must complete a
mentored internship complemented by flexibly scheduled training and coursework
offered at a local site, such as a school or educational service district, or
online or via video-conference over the K-20 network, in collaboration with the
partnership program's higher education partner. In addition, partnership grant
programs shall uphold entry requirements for candidates that include:

(a) District or
building validation of qualifications, including three years of successful
student interaction and leadership as classified staff;

(b) A baccalaureate
degree from a regionally accredited institution of higher education. The
individual's college or university grade point average may be considered as a
selection factor;

(c) Successful
completion of the content test, once the state content test is available;

(d) Meeting the age,
good moral character, and personal fitness requirements adopted by rule for
teachers; and

(e) Successful passage
of the statewide basic skills exam, when available.

(3) Partnership grant
programs seeking funds to operate route three programs shall enroll individuals
with baccalaureate degrees, who are not employed in the district at the time of
application, or who hold emergency substitute certificates. When selecting
candidates for certification through route three, districts shall give priority
to individuals who are seeking residency teacher certification in subject
matter shortage areas or shortages due to geographic locations. For route
three only, the districts may include additional candidates in nonshortage
subject areas if the candidates are seeking endorsements with a secondary grade
level designation as defined by rule by the state board of education. The
districts shall disclose to candidates in nonshortage subject areas available
information on the demand in those subject areas. Cohorts of candidates for this
route shall attend an intensive summer teaching academy, followed by a full
year employed by a district in a mentored internship, followed, if necessary,
by a second summer teaching academy. In addition, partnership programs shall
uphold entry requirements for candidates that include:

(a) Five years'
experience in the work force;

(b) A baccalaureate
degree from a regionally accredited institution of higher education. The
individual's grade point average may be considered as a selection factor;

(c) Successful
completion of the content test, once the state content test is available;

(d) External validation
of qualifications, including demonstrated successful experience with students
or children, such as references letters and letters of support from previous
employers;

(e) Meeting the age,
good moral character, and personal fitness requirements adopted by rule for
teachers; and

(f) Successful passage
of statewide basic skills exams, when available.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
6. The alternative route
conditional scholarship program is created under the following guidelines:

(1) The program shall
be administered by the higher education coordinating board. In administering
the program, the higher education coordinating board has the following powers
and duties:

(a) To adopt necessary
rules and develop guidelines to administer the program;

(b) To collect and
manage repayments from participants who do not meet their service obligations;
and

(c) To accept grants
and donations from public and private sources for the program.

(2) The Washington
professional educator standards board shall select interns who are eligible to
receive conditional scholarships.

(3) In order to receive
conditional scholarship awards, recipients shall be accepted and maintain
enrollment in alternative certification routes through the partnership grant
program, as provided in section 5 of this act. Recipients must continue to
make satisfactory progress towards completion of the alternative route certification
program and receipt of a residency teaching certificate.

(4) For the purpose of
this chapter, a conditional scholarship is a loan that is forgiven in whole or
in part in exchange for service as a certificated teacher employed in a
Washington state K-12 public school. The state shall forgive one year of loan
obligation for every two years a recipient teaches in a public school.
Recipients that fail to continue a course of study leading to residency teacher
certification or cease to teach in a public school in the state of Washington
in their endorsement area are required to repay the remaining loan principal
with interest.

(5) Recipients who fail
to fulfill the required teaching obligation are required to repay the remaining
loan principal with interest and any other applicable fees. The higher
education coordinating board shall adopt rules to define the terms for
repayment, including applicable interest rates, fees, and deferments.

(6) To the extent funds
are appropriated for this specific purpose, the annual amount of the
scholarship is the annual cost of tuition for the alternative route
certification program in which the recipient is enrolled, not to exceed four
thousand dollars. The board may adjust the annual award by the average rate of
resident undergraduate tuition and fee increases at the state universities as
defined in RCW 28B.10.016.

(7) The higher
education coordinating board may deposit all appropriations, collections, and
any other funds received for the program in this chapter in the student loan
account authorized in RCW 28B.102.060.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
7. This chapter expires June
30, 2005.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
8. The Washington state
institute for public policy shall submit to the education and fiscal committees
of the legislature, the governor, the state board of education, and the
Washington professional educator standards board, an interim evaluation of
partnership grant programs funded under this chapter by December 1, 2002, and a
final evaluation by December 1, 2004. If specific funding for the purposes of
this section, referencing this section and this act by bill or chapter number,
is not provided by June 30, 2001, in the omnibus appropriations act, this
section is null and void.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
9. Sections 1 through 8 and
10 of this act constitute a new chapter in Title 28A RCW.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 10. School districts or
approved private schools' ability to employ personnel under certification for
emergency or temporary, substitute, or provisional duty as authorized by
chapter 28A.410 RCW are not affected by the provisions of this act.

---
END ---