BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF
WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1. RCW 90.82.040 and 1998 c
247 s 1 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) Once a WRIA
planning unit has been initiated under RCW 90.82.060 and a lead agency has been
designated, it shall notify the department and may apply to the department for
funding assistance for conducting the planning. Funds shall be provided from
and to the extent of appropriations made by the legislature to the department
expressly for this purpose.

(2)(a) Each
planning unit that has complied with subsection (1) of this section is eligible
to receive watershed planning grants in the following amounts for three phases
of watershed planning:

(((a))) (i)
Initiating governments may apply for an initial organizing grant of up to fifty
thousand dollars for a single WRIA or up to seventy-five thousand dollars for a
multi-WRIA management area in accordance with RCW 90.82.060(4);

(((b))) (ii)
A planning unit may apply for up to two hundred thousand dollars for each WRIA
in the management area for conducting watershed assessments in accordance with
RCW 90.82.070, except that a planning unit whose initiating governments
choose to include an instream flow, water quality, or habitat component in
accordance with RCW 90.82.080 through 90.82.100 may apply for additional funds
to conduct assessments of up to one hundred thousand dollars for each component
included; and

(((c))) (iii)
A planning unit may apply for up to two hundred fifty thousand dollars for each
WRIA in the management area for developing a watershed plan and making
recommendations for actions by local, state, and federal agencies, tribes,
private property owners, private organizations, and individual citizens,
including a recommended list of strategies and projects that would further the
purpose of the plan in accordance with RCW 90.82.060 through 90.82.100.

(b) A planning unit
may request a different amount for phase two or phase three of watershed
planning than is specified in (a) of this subsection, provided that the total
amount of funds awarded do not exceed the maximum amount the planning unit is
eligible for under (a) of this subsection. The department shall not approve an
alternate allocation of funds unless the planning unit demonstrates that an
alternate allocation will not impair the unit's ability to complete a plan in
accordance with this chapter.

(3)(a) The department
shall use the eligibility criteria in this subsection (3) instead of rules,
policies, or guidelines when evaluating grant applications at each stage of the
grants program.

(b) In reviewing grant
applications under this subsection (3), the department shall evaluate whether:

(i) The planning unit
meets all of the requirements of this chapter;

(ii) The application
demonstrates a need for state planning funds to accomplish the objectives of
the planning process; and

(iii) The application
and supporting information evidences a readiness to proceed.

(c) In ranking grant
applications submitted at each stage of the grants program, the department
shall give preference to applications in the following order of priority:

(i) Applications from
existing planning groups that have been in existence for at least one year;

(ii) Applications that
address protection and enhancement of fish habitat in watersheds that have
aquatic fish species listed or proposed to be listed as endangered or
threatened under the federal endangered species act, 16 U.S.C. Sec. 1531 et
seq. and for which there is evidence of an inability to supply adequate water
for population and economic growth from:

(A) First, multi-WRIA
planning; and

(B) Second, single WRIA
planning;

(iii) Applications that
address protection and enhancement of fish habitat in watersheds or for which
there is evidence of an inability to supply adequate water for population and
economic growth from:

(A) First, multi-WRIA
planning; and

(B) Second, single WRIA
planning.

(d) The department may
not impose any local matching fund requirement as a condition for grant
eligibility or as a preference for receiving a grant.

(4) The department may
retain up to one percent of funds allocated under this section to defray
administrative costs.

(5) Planning under this
chapter should be completed as expeditiously as possible, with the focus being
on local stakeholders cooperating to meet local needs.

(6)
Funding provided under this section shall be considered a contractual
obligation against the moneys appropriated for this purpose.

--- END ---