BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF
WASHINGTON:

PART I

EXTEND EXPEDITED RULE-MAKING AUTHORITY

Sec. 1. RCW 34.05.230 and 1997 c
409 s 202 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) ((An agency may
file notice for the expedited adoption of rules in accordance with the
procedures set forth in this section for rules meeting any one of the following
criteria:

(a) The proposed
rules relate only to internal governmental operations that are not subject to
violation by a person;

(b) The proposed
rules adopt or incorporate by reference without material change federal
statutes or regulations, Washington state statutes, rules of other Washington
state agencies, shoreline master programs other than those programs governing
shorelines of state-wide significance, or, as referenced by Washington state
law, national consensus codes that generally establish industry standards, if
the material adopted or incorporated regulates the same subject matter and
conduct as the adopting or incorporating rule;

(c) The proposed
rules only correct typographical errors, make address or name changes, or
clarify language of a rule without changing its effect;

(d) The content of
the proposed rules is explicitly and specifically dictated by statute;

(e) The proposed
rules have been the subject of negotiated rule making, pilot rule making, or
some other process that involved substantial participation by interested
parties before the development of the proposed rule; or

(f) The proposed
rule is being amended after a review under RCW 34.05.328 or section 210 of this
act.

(2) The expedited
rule-making process must follow the requirements for rule making set forth in
RCW 34.05.320, except that the agency is not required to prepare a small
business economic impact statement under RCW 19.85.025, a statement indicating
whether the rule constitutes a significant legislative rule under RCW 34.05.328(5)(c)(iii),
or a significant legislative rule analysis under RCW 34.05.328. An agency is
not required to prepare statements of inquiry under RCW 34.05.310 or conduct a
hearing for the expedited adoption of rules. The notice for the expedited
adoption of rules must contain a statement in at least ten-point type, that is
substantially in the following form:

NOTICE

THIS
RULE IS BEING PROPOSED TO BE ADOPTED USING AN EXPEDITED RULE-MAKING PROCESS
THAT WILL ELIMINATE THE NEED FOR THE AGENCY TO HOLD PUBLIC HEARINGS, PREPARE A
SMALL BUSINESS ECONOMIC IMPACT STATEMENT, OR PROVIDE RESPONSES TO THE CRITERIA
FOR A SIGNIFICANT LEGISLATIVE RULE. IF YOU OBJECT TO THIS RULE BEING ADOPTED
USING THE EXPEDITED RULE-MAKING PROCESS, YOU MUST EXPRESS YOUR OBJECTIONS IN
WRITING AND THEY MUST BE SENT TO (INSERT NAME AND ADDRESS) AND RECEIVED BY
(INSERT DATE).

(3) The agency shall
send a copy of the notice of the proposed expedited rule making to any person
who has requested notification of proposals for the expedited adoption of rules
or of agency rule making, as well as the joint administrative rules review
committee, within three days after its publication in the Washington State
Register. An agency may charge for the actual cost of providing a requesting
party mailed copies of these notices. The notice of the proposed expedited
rule making must be preceded by a statement substantially in the form provided
in subsection (2) of this section. The notice must also include an explanation
of the reasons the agency believes the expedited adoption of the rule is
appropriate.

(4) The code reviser
shall publish the text of all rules proposed for expedited adoption along with
the notice required in this section in a separate section of the Washington
State Register. Once the text of the proposed rules has been published in the
Washington State Register, the only changes that an agency may make in the text
of these proposed rules before their final adoption are to correct
typographical errors.

(5) Any person may
file a written objection to the expedited adoption of a rule. The objection
must be filed with the agency rules coordinator within forty-five days after
the notice of the proposed expedited rule making has been published in the
Washington State Register. A person who has filed a written objection to the
expedited adoption of a rule may withdraw the objection.

(6) If no written
objections to the expedited adoption of a rule are filed with the agency within
forty-five days after the notice of proposed expedited rule making is
published, or if all objections that have been filed are withdrawn by the
persons filing the objections, the agency may enter an order adopting the rule
without further notice or a public hearing. The order must be published in the
manner required by this chapter for any other agency order adopting, amending,
or repealing a rule.

(7) If a written
notice of objection to the expedited adoption of the rule is timely filed with
the agency and is not withdrawn, the notice of proposed expedited rule making
published under this section is considered a statement of inquiry for the
purposes of RCW 34.05.310, and the agency may initiate further rule adoption
proceedings in accordance with this chapter.

(8) Subsections (1)
through (8) of this section expire on December 31, 2000.

an [An])) An agency is encouraged to advise the
public of its current opinions, approaches, and likely courses of action by
means of interpretive or policy statements. Current interpretive and policy
statements are advisory only. To better inform and involve the public, an
agency is encouraged to convert long-standing interpretive and policy statements
into rules.

(2) A person may
petition an agency requesting the conversion of interpretive and policy
statements into rules. Upon submission, the agency shall notify the joint
administrative rules review committee of the petition. Within sixty days after
submission of a petition, the agency shall either deny the petition in writing,
stating its reasons for the denial, or initiate rule-making proceedings in
accordance with this chapter.

(((11))) (3)
Each agency shall maintain a roster of interested persons, consisting of
persons who have requested in writing to be notified of all interpretive and
policy statements issued by that agency. Each agency shall update the roster
once each year and eliminate persons who do not indicate a desire to continue on
the roster. Whenever an agency issues an interpretive or policy statement, it
shall send a copy of the statement to each person listed on the roster. The
agency may charge a nominal fee to the interested person for this service.

(((12))) (4)
Whenever an agency issues an interpretive or policy statement, it shall submit
to the code reviser for publication in the Washington State Register a
statement describing the subject matter of the interpretive or policy
statement, and listing the person at the agency from whom a copy of the
interpretive or policy statement may be obtained.

Sec. 2. RCW 34.05.310 and 1995 c
403 s 301 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) To meet the intent
of providing greater public access to administrative rule making and to promote
consensus among interested parties, agencies shall solicit comments from the
public on a subject of possible rule making before filing with the code reviser
a notice of proposed rule making under RCW 34.05.320. The agency shall prepare
a statement of inquiry that:

(a) Identifies the
specific statute or statutes authorizing the agency to adopt rules on this
subject;

(b) Discusses why rules
on this subject may be needed and what they might accomplish;

(c) Identifies other
federal and state agencies that regulate this subject, and describes the
process whereby the agency would coordinate the contemplated rule with these
agencies;

(d) Discusses the
process by which the rule might be developed, including, but not limited to,
negotiated rule making, pilot rule making, or agency study;

(e) Specifies the
process by which interested parties can effectively participate in the decision
to adopt a new rule and formulation of a proposed rule before its publication.

The statement of
inquiry shall be filed with the code reviser ((for publication)) and
published in the state register at least thirty days before the date the
agency files notice of proposed rule making under RCW 34.05.320 and shall be
sent to any party that has requested receipt of the agency's statements of
inquiry.

(2) Agencies are
encouraged to develop and use new procedures for reaching agreement among
interested parties before publication of notice and the adoption hearing on a
proposed rule. Examples of new procedures include, but are not limited to:

(a) Negotiated rule
making by which representatives of an agency and of the interests that are
affected by a subject of rule making, including, where appropriate, county and
city representatives, seek to reach consensus on the terms of the proposed rule
and on the process by which it is negotiated; and

(b) Pilot rule making
which includes testing the feasibility of complying with or administering draft
new rules or draft amendments to existing rules through the use of volunteer
pilot groups in various areas and circumstances, as provided in RCW 34.05.313
or as otherwise provided by the agency.

(3)(a) An agency must
make a determination whether negotiated rule making, pilot rule making, or
another process for generating participation from interested parties prior to
development of the rule is appropriate.

(b) An agency must
include a written justification in the rule-making file if an opportunity for
interested parties to participate in the rule-making process prior to
publication of the proposed rule has not been provided.

(4) Statements
issued by an agency under this section and filed with the code reviser are
regarded as withdrawn if the agency has not proposed a rule as provided by RCW
34.05.320 within one hundred eighty days after publication of the statement in
the register.

(5) This section
does not apply to:

(a) Emergency rules
adopted under RCW 34.05.350;

(b) ((Rules relating
only to internal governmental operations that are not subject to violation by a
nongovernment party;

(c) Rules adopting
or incorporating by reference without material change federal statutes or
regulations, Washington state statutes, rules of other Washington state agencies,
shoreline master programs other than those programs governing shorelines of
state-wide significance, or, as referenced by Washington state law, national
consensus codes that generally establish industry standards, if the material
adopted or incorporated regulates the same subject matter and conduct as the
adopting or incorporating rule;

(d) Rules that only
correct typographical errors, make address or name changes, or clarify language
of a rule without changing its effect;

(e) Rules the
content of which is explicitly and specifically dictated by statute;

(f))) Rules that can be adopted or repealed using
expedited rule making under section 3 of this act;

(c) Rules that
set or adjust fees or rates pursuant to legislative standards; or

(((g))) (d)
Rules that adopt, amend, or repeal:

(i) A procedure,
practice, or requirement relating to agency hearings; or

(ii) A filing or
related process requirement for applying to an agency for a license or permit.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
3. A new section is added
to chapter 34.05 RCW to read as follows:

(1) An agency may file
notice for the expedited adoption of rules in accordance with the procedures
set forth in this section for rules meeting any one of the following criteria:

(a) The proposed rules
relate only to internal governmental operations that are not subject to
violation by a person;

(b) The proposed rules
adopt or incorporate by reference without material change federal statutes or
regulations, Washington state statutes, rules of other Washington state
agencies, shoreline master programs other than those programs governing
shorelines of statewide significance, or, as referenced by Washington state
law, national consensus codes that generally establish industry standards, if the
material adopted or incorporated regulates the same subject matter and conduct
as the adopting or incorporating rule;

(c) The proposed rules
only correct typographical errors, make address or name changes, or clarify
language of a rule without changing its effect;

(d) The content of the
proposed rules is explicitly and specifically dictated by statute;

(e) The proposed rules
have been the subject of negotiated rule making, pilot rule making, or some
other process that involved substantial participation by interested parties
before the development of the proposed rule; or

(f) The proposed rule
is being amended after a review under RCW 34.05.328.

(2) An agency may file
notice for the expedited repeal of rules under the procedures set forth in this
section for rules meeting any one of the following criteria:

(a) The statute on
which the rule is based has been repealed and has not been replaced by another
statute providing statutory authority for the rule;

(b) The statute on
which the rule is based has been declared unconstitutional by a court with
jurisdiction, there is a final judgment, and no statute has been enacted to
replace the unconstitutional statute;

(c) The rule is no
longer necessary because of changed circumstances; or

(d) Other rules of the
agency or of another agency govern the same activity as the rule, making the
rule redundant.

(3) The expedited
rule-making process must follow the requirements for rule making set forth in
RCW 34.05.320, except that the agency is not required to prepare a small
business economic impact statement under RCW 19.85.025, a statement indicating
whether the rule constitutes a significant legislative rule under RCW
34.05.328(5)(c)(iii), or a significant legislative rule analysis under RCW
34.05.328. An agency is not required to prepare statements of inquiry under
RCW 34.05.310 or conduct a hearing for the expedited rule making. The notice
for the expedited rule making must contain a statement in at least ten-point
type, that is substantially in the following form:

NOTICE

THIS
RULE IS BEING PROPOSED UNDER AN EXPEDITED RULE-MAKING PROCESS THAT WILL
ELIMINATE THE NEED FOR THE AGENCY TO HOLD PUBLIC HEARINGS, PREPARE A SMALL
BUSINESS ECONOMIC IMPACT STATEMENT, OR PROVIDE RESPONSES TO THE CRITERIA FOR A
SIGNIFICANT LEGISLATIVE RULE. IF YOU OBJECT TO THIS USE OF THE EXPEDITED
RULE-MAKING PROCESS, YOU MUST EXPRESS YOUR OBJECTIONS IN WRITING AND THEY MUST
BE SENT TO (INSERT NAME AND ADDRESS) AND RECEIVED BY (INSERT DATE).

(4) The agency shall
send a copy of the notice of the proposed expedited rule making to any person
who has requested notification of proposals for expedited rule making or of
regular agency rule making, as well as the joint administrative rules review
committee, within three days after its publication in the Washington State
Register. An agency may charge for the actual cost of providing a requesting
party mailed copies of these notices. The notice of the proposed expedited
rule making must be preceded by a statement substantially in the form provided
in subsection (3) of this section. The notice must also include an explanation
of the reasons the agency believes the expedited rule-making process is
appropriate.

(5) The code reviser
shall publish the text of all rules proposed for expedited adoption, and the citation
and caption of all rules proposed for expedited repeal, along with the notice
required in this section in a separate section of the Washington State
Register. Once the notice of expedited rule making has been published in the
Washington State Register, the only changes that an agency may make in the
noticed materials before their final adoption or repeal are to correct
typographical errors.

(6) Any person may file
a written objection to the expedited rule making. The objection must be filed
with the agency rules coordinator within forty-five days after the notice of
the proposed expedited rule making has been published in the Washington State
Register. A person who has filed a written objection to the expedited rule
making may withdraw the objection.

(7) If no written
objections to the expedited rule making are filed with the agency within
forty-five days after the notice of proposed expedited rule making is
published, or if all objections that have been filed are withdrawn by the
persons filing the objections, the agency may enter an order adopting or
repealing the rule without further notice or a public hearing. The order must
be published in the manner required by this chapter for any other agency order
adopting, amending, or repealing a rule.

(8) If a written notice
of objection to the expedited rule making is timely filed with the agency and
is not withdrawn, the notice of proposed expedited rule making published under
this section is considered a statement of inquiry for the purposes of RCW 34.05.310,
and the agency may initiate further rule-making proceedings in accordance with
this chapter.

(9) This section
expires July 1, 2005.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
4. RCW 34.05.354 (Expedited repeal) and
1998 c 280 s 6, 1997 c 409 s 208, & 1995 c 403 s 701 are each repealed.

PART
II

NORMAL RULE-MAKING PROCEDURES

Sec. 5. RCW 34.05.320 and 1995 c
403 s 302 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) At least twenty
days before the rule-making hearing at which the agency receives public comment
regarding adoption of a rule, the agency shall cause notice of the hearing to
be published in the state register. The publication constitutes the proposal
of a rule. The notice shall include all of the following:

(a) A title, a
description of the rule's purpose, and any other information which may be of
assistance in identifying the rule or its purpose;

(b) Citations of the
statutory authority for adopting the rule and the specific statute the rule is
intended to implement;

(c) A summary of the
rule and a statement of the reasons supporting the proposed action;

(d) The agency
personnel, with their office location and telephone number, who are responsible
for the drafting, implementation, and enforcement of the rule;

(e) The name of the
person or organization, whether private, public, or governmental, proposing the
rule;

(f) Agency comments or
recommendations, if any, regarding statutory language, implementation,
enforcement, and fiscal matters pertaining to the rule;

(g) Whether the rule is
necessary as the result of federal law or federal or state court action, and if
so, a copy of such law or court decision shall be attached to the purpose
statement;

(h) An explanation
of the differences between the rule and any federal or state law dealing with
the same activity or subject matter;

(i) When, where,
and how persons may present their views on the proposed rule;

(((i))) (j)
The date on which the agency intends to adopt the rule;

(((j))) (k)
A short explanation of the rule, its purpose, and anticipated effects,
including in the case of a proposal that would modify existing rules, a short
description of the changes the proposal would make;

(((k))) (l) A
copy of the local government economic impact statement prepared under section
31 of this act;

(m) A copy of
the small business economic impact statement prepared under chapter 19.85 RCW,
or an explanation for why the agency did not prepare the statement; and

(((l))) (n)
A statement indicating whether RCW 34.05.328 applies to the rule adoption.

(2) Upon filing notice
of the proposed rule with the code reviser, the adopting agency shall have
copies of the notice on file and available for public inspection and shall
forward three copies of the notice to the rules review committee.

(3) No later than three
days after its publication in the state register, the agency shall cause a copy
of the notice of proposed rule adoption to be mailed to each person, city, and
county that has made a request to the agency for a mailed copy of such
notices. An agency may charge for the actual cost of providing a requesting
party mailed copies of these notices.

(4) In addition to the
notice required by subsections (1) and (2) of this section, an institution of
higher education shall cause the notice to be published in the campus or
standard newspaper of the institution at least seven days before the
rule-making hearing.

Sec. 6. RCW 34.05.328 and 1997 c
430 s 1 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) Before ((adopting))
proposing a rule described in subsection (5) of this section, an agency
shall:

(a) Clearly state in
detail the general goals and specific objectives of the statute that the rule
implements;

(b) Determine that the
rule is needed to achieve the general goals and specific objectives stated
under (a) of this subsection, and analyze alternatives to rule making and the
consequences of not adopting the rule;

(c) Determine that the
probable benefits of the rule are greater than its probable costs, taking into
account both the qualitative and quantitative benefits and costs and the
specific directives of the statute being implemented;

(d) Determine, after
considering alternative versions of the rule and the analysis required under
(b) and (c) of this subsection, that the rule being adopted is the least
burdensome alternative for those required to comply with it that will achieve
the general goals and specific objectives stated under (a) of this subsection;

(e) Determine that the
rule does not require those to whom it applies to take an action that violates
requirements of another federal or state law;

(f) Determine that the
rule does not impose more stringent performance requirements on private
entities than on public entities unless required to do so by federal or state
law;

(g) Determine if the
rule differs from any federal or state regulation or statute applicable
to the same activity or subject matter and, if so, determine that the
difference is justified by the following:

(i) A state statute
that explicitly allows the agency to differ from federal standards; or

(ii) Substantial
evidence that the difference is necessary to achieve the general goals and
specific objectives stated under (a) of this subsection; and

(h) Coordinate the
rule, to the maximum extent practicable, with other federal, state, and local
laws applicable to the same activity or subject matter.

(2) In making its
determinations pursuant to subsection (1)(b) through (g) of this section, the
agency shall place in the rule-making file documentation of sufficient quantity
and quality so as to persuade a reasonable person that the determinations are
justified.

(3) Before adopting
rules described in subsection (5) of this section, an agency shall place in the
rule-making file a rule implementation plan for rules filed under each adopting
order. The plan shall describe how the agency intends to:

(a) Implement and
enforce the rule, including a description of the resources the agency intends
to use;

(b) Inform and educate
affected persons about the rule;

(c) Promote and assist
voluntary compliance; and

(d) Evaluate whether
the rule achieves the purpose for which it was adopted, including, to the
maximum extent practicable, the use of interim milestones to assess progress
and the use of objectively measurable outcomes.

(4) After adopting a
rule described in subsection (5) of this section regulating the same activity
or subject matter as another provision of federal or state law, an agency shall
do all of the following:

(a) Provide to the ((business
assistance center)) department of community, trade, and economic
development a list citing by reference the other federal and state laws
that regulate the same activity or subject matter;

(b) Coordinate
implementation and enforcement of the rule with the other federal and state
entities regulating the same activity or subject matter by making every effort
to do one or more of the following:

(i) Deferring to the
other entity;

(ii) Designating a lead
agency; or

(iii) Entering into an
agreement with the other entities specifying how the agency and entities will
coordinate implementation and enforcement.

If the agency is unable
to comply with this subsection (4)(b), the agency shall report to the
legislature pursuant to (c) of this subsection;

(c) Report to the joint
administrative rules review committee:

(i) The existence of
any overlap or duplication of other federal or state laws, any differences from
federal law, and any known overlap, duplication, or conflict with local laws;
and

(ii) Make
recommendations for any legislation that may be necessary to eliminate or
mitigate any adverse effects of such overlap, duplication, or difference.

(5)(a) Except as
provided in (b) of this subsection, this section applies to:

(i) Significant
legislative rules of the departments of ecology, labor and industries, health,
revenue, social and health services, and natural resources, the employment
security department, the forest practices board, the office of the insurance
commissioner, and to the legislative rules of the department of fish and
wildlife implementing chapter ((75.20)) 77.55 RCW; and

(ii) Any rule of any
agency, if this section is voluntarily made applicable to the rule by the
agency, or is made applicable to the rule by a majority vote of the joint
administrative rules review committee within forty-five days of receiving the
notice of proposed rule making under RCW 34.05.320.

(b) This section does
not apply to:

(i) Emergency rules
adopted under RCW 34.05.350;

(ii) Rules relating
only to internal governmental operations that are not subject to violation by a
nongovernment party;

(iii) Rules adopting or
incorporating by reference without material change federal statutes or
regulations, Washington state statutes, rules of other Washington state
agencies, shoreline master programs other than those programs governing
shorelines of statewide significance, or, as referenced by Washington state
law, national consensus codes that generally establish industry standards, if
the material adopted or incorporated regulates the same subject matter and
conduct as the adopting or incorporating rule;

(iv) Rules that only
correct typographical errors, make address or name changes, or clarify language
of a rule without changing its effect;

(v) Rules the content
of which is explicitly and specifically dictated by statute;

(vi) Rules that set or
adjust fees or rates pursuant to legislative standards; or

(vii) Rules of the
department of social and health services relating only to client medical or
financial eligibility and rules concerning liability for care of dependents.

(c) For purposes of
this subsection:

(i) A "procedural
rule" is a rule that adopts, amends, or repeals (A) any procedure,
practice, or requirement relating to any agency hearings; (B) any filing or
related process requirement for making application to an agency for a license
or permit; or (C) any policy statement pertaining to the consistent internal
operations of an agency.

(ii) An
"interpretive rule" is a rule, the violation of which does not
subject a person to a penalty or sanction, that sets forth the agency’s
interpretation of statutory provisions it administers.

(iii) A
"significant legislative rule" is a rule other than a procedural or
interpretive rule that (A) adopts substantive provisions of law pursuant to delegated
legislative authority, the violation of which subjects a violator of such rule
to a penalty or sanction; (B) establishes, alters, or revokes any qualification
or standard for the issuance, suspension, or revocation of a license or permit;
or (C) adopts a new, or makes significant amendments to, a policy or regulatory
program.

(d) In the notice of
proposed rule making under RCW 34.05.320, an agency shall state whether this
section applies to the proposed rule pursuant to (a)(i) of this subsection, or
if the agency will apply this section voluntarily.

(6) By January 31,
1996, and by January 31st of each even-numbered year thereafter, the office of
financial management, after consulting with state agencies, counties, and
cities, and business, labor, and environmental organizations, shall report to
the governor and the legislature regarding the effects of this section on the
regulatory system in this state. The report shall document:

(a) The rules proposed
to which this section applied and to the extent possible, how compliance with
this section affected the substance of the rule, if any, that the agency
ultimately adopted;

(b) The costs incurred
by state agencies in complying with this section;

(c) Any legal action
maintained based upon the alleged failure of any agency to comply with this
section, the costs to the state of such action, and the result;

(d) The extent to which
this section has adversely affected the capacity of agencies to fulfill their
legislatively prescribed mission;

(e) The extent to which
this section has improved the acceptability of state rules to those regulated;
and

(f) Any other
information considered by the office of financial management to be useful in
evaluating the effect of this section.

Sec. 7. RCW 34.05.350 and 1994 c
249 s 3 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) If an agency for
good cause finds:

(a) That immediate
adoption, amendment, or repeal of a rule is necessary for the preservation of
the public health, safety, or general welfare, and that observing the time
requirements of notice and opportunity to comment upon adoption of a permanent
rule would be contrary to the public interest; or

(b) That state or
federal law or federal rule or a federal deadline for state receipt of federal
funds requires immediate adoption of a rule,

the agency may dispense
with those requirements and adopt, amend, or repeal the rule on an emergency
basis. ((The agency's finding and a concise statement of the reasons for
its finding shall be incorporated in)) The order for adoption of the
emergency rule or amendment filed with the office of the code reviser under RCW
34.05.380 and with the rules review committee must contain the governor's
signature approving the adoption of the emergency rule or amendment if
immediate adoption is found necessary for the preservation of the general
welfare. In that case, the governor shall also include a statement explaining
why the rule is necessary for that reason. For all other emergency rules, the
order of adoption must contain the agency's finding and a concise statement of
the reasons for its finding.

(2) An emergency rule
adopted under this section takes effect upon filing with the code reviser,
unless a later date is specified in the order of adoption, and may not remain
in effect for longer than one hundred twenty days after filing. Identical or
substantially similar emergency rules may not be adopted in sequence unless
conditions have changed or the agency has filed notice of its intent to adopt
the rule as a permanent rule, and is actively undertaking the appropriate
procedures to adopt the rule as a permanent rule. This section does not
relieve any agency from compliance with any law requiring that its permanent
rules be approved by designated persons or bodies before they become effective.

(3) Within seven days
after the rule is adopted, any person may petition the governor requesting the
immediate repeal of a rule adopted on an emergency basis by any department
listed in RCW 43.17.010. Within seven days after submission of the petition,
the governor shall either deny the petition in writing, stating his or her
reasons for the denial, or order the immediate repeal of the rule. In ruling
on the petition, the governor shall consider only whether the conditions in
subsection (1) of this section were met such that adoption of the rule on an
emergency basis was necessary. If the governor orders the repeal of the
emergency rule, any sanction imposed based on that rule is void. This
subsection shall not be construed to prohibit adoption of any rule as a
permanent rule.

(((4) In adopting an
emergency rule, the agency shall comply with section 4 of this act or provide a
written explanation for its failure to do so.))

Sec. 8. RCW 34.05.380 and 1989 c
175 s 11 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) Each agency shall
file in the office of the code reviser a certified copy of all rules it adopts,
except for rules contained in tariffs filed with or published by the Washington
utilities and transportation commission. The code reviser shall place upon
each rule a notation of the time and date of filing and shall keep a permanent
register of filed rules open to public inspection. In filing a rule, each
agency shall use the standard form prescribed for this purpose by the code
reviser.

(2)(a) Emergency
rules adopted under RCW 34.05.350 become effective upon filing unless a later
date is specified in the order of adoption.

(b) All other
rules become effective upon the expiration of thirty days after the ((date
of filing)) adjournment of the regular session of the legislature in the
calendar year after the year in which the rule was adopted, unless a later
date is required by statute or specified in the order of adoption.

(c) This subsection
(2) does not apply to a rule authorized to take effect under subsection (3) of
this section.

(3) A rule may become
effective immediately upon its filing with the code reviser or on any
subsequent date earlier than that established by subsection (2) of this
section, if the agency establishes that effective date in the adopting order
and finds that:

(a) Such action is
required by the state or federal Constitution, a statute, or court order;

(b) The rule only
delays the effective date of another rule that is not yet effective; or

(c) The earlier
effective date is necessary because of imminent peril to the public health,
safety, or welfare.

The finding and a brief
statement of the reasons therefor required by this subsection shall be made a
part of the order adopting the rule.

(4) With respect to a
rule made effective pursuant to subsection (3) of this section, each agency
shall make reasonable efforts to make the effective date known to persons who
may be affected by it.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
9. RCW 34.05.380(2)(b)
applies only to rules adopted after the effective date of this section.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
10. A new section is added
to chapter 34.05 RCW to read as follows:

(1) Every rule adopted
under this chapter before the effective date of this section that is still in
effect one day less than five years after the effective date of this section,
terminates five years after the effective date of this section.

(2) A rule adopted
under this chapter on or after the effective date of this section that is still
in effect one day less than five years after the date the rule was adopted,
terminates five years after the date the rule was adopted. The amendment of a
rule that was adopted on or after the effective date of this section
establishes a new date for calculating this five-year termination date.

PART
III

LIMIT RULE-MAKING
AUTHORITY OF DEPARTMENT OF ECOLOGY

AND DEPARTMENT OF LABOR AND
INDUSTRIES

NEW SECTION. Sec.
11. (1) The legislature
recognizes that clear and specific grants of rule-making authority are
necessary for accountability in decision making by governmental agencies, and
that an agency should exercise jurisdiction and adopt rules over a subject
matter only if it has obvious and explicit rule-making authority to do so. It
is therefore the legislature's purpose to ensure that existing and future rules
exist only under clear and appropriate rule-making authority.

(2) The legislature
further finds that state agencies have adopted administrative rules without
clear authority to do so from the legislature, relying on general grants of
authority rather than specific legislative policy direction. This has resulted
in agency-initiated policy that has been adopted without the benefit of the
public dialogue and accountability inherent to the legislative process. It is
therefore the intent of the legislature to eliminate reliance on general grants
of authority, limit certain agency rule making to those matters specifically
authorized by the legislature, and that grants of rule-making authority be
narrowly construed.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
12. A new section is added
to chapter 43.21A RCW to read as follows:

The director of the
department of ecology may adopt, in accordance with chapter 34.05 RCW, rules or
policy statements, other than emergency rules, only:

(1) As specifically
required by federal law, and only to the extent specifically required; or

(2) As specifically
authorized, and only to the extent specifically authorized, by the legislature.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
13. A new section is added
to chapter 43.22 RCW to read as follows:

The director of the
department of labor and industries may adopt in accordance with chapter 34.05
RCW, rules or policy statements, other than emergency rules, only:

(1) As specifically
required by federal law, and only to the extent specifically required; or

(2) As specifically
authorized, and only to the extent specifically authorized, by the legislature.

PART
IV

JUDICIAL REVIEW

Sec. 14. RCW 34.05.570 and 1995 c
403 s 802 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) Generally. Except
to the extent that this chapter or another statute provides otherwise:

(a) Except as
provided in subsection (2) of this section and except that an agency bears the
burden of demonstrating that the agency action was authorized by law, the
burden of demonstrating the invalidity of agency action is on the party
asserting invalidity;

(b) The validity of
agency action shall be determined in accordance with the standards of review
provided in this section, as applied to the agency action at the time it was
taken;

(c) The court shall
make a separate and distinct ruling on each material issue on which the court's
decision is based; and

(d) The court shall
grant relief only if it determines that a person seeking judicial relief has
been substantially prejudiced by the action complained of.

(2) Review of rules.
(a) A rule may be reviewed by petition for declaratory judgment filed pursuant
to this subsection or in the context of any other review proceeding under this
section. In an action challenging the validity of a rule, the agency shall be
made a party to the proceeding.

(b) The validity of any
rule may be determined upon petition for a declaratory judgment addressed to
the superior court of Thurston county, when it appears that the rule, or its
threatened application, interferes with or impairs or immediately threatens to
interfere with or impair the legal rights or privileges of the petitioner. When
the validity of a rule is challenged, after the petitioner has identified the
defects in the rule, the burden of going forward with the evidence is on the
agency. The declaratory judgment order may be entered whether or not the
petitioner has first requested the agency to pass upon the validity of the rule
in question.

(c) In a proceeding
involving review of a rule, the court shall declare the rule invalid only if it
finds that: The rule violates constitutional provisions; the rule exceeds the
statutory authority of the agency; the rule was adopted without compliance with
statutory rule-making procedures; or the rule is arbitrary and capricious.

(3) Review of agency
orders in adjudicative proceedings. The court shall grant relief from an
agency order in an adjudicative proceeding only if it determines that:

(a) The order, or the
statute or rule on which the order is based, is in violation of constitutional
provisions on its face or as applied;

(b) The order is
outside the statutory authority or jurisdiction of the agency conferred by any
provision of law;

(c) The agency has
engaged in unlawful procedure or decision-making process, or has failed to
follow a prescribed procedure;

(d) The agency has
erroneously interpreted or applied the law;

(e) The order is not
supported by evidence that is substantial when viewed in light of the whole
record before the court, which includes the agency record for judicial review,
supplemented by any additional evidence received by the court under this
chapter;

(f) The agency has not
decided all issues requiring resolution by the agency;

(g) A motion for
disqualification under RCW 34.05.425 or 34.12.050 was made and was improperly
denied or, if no motion was made, facts are shown to support the grant of such
a motion that were not known and were not reasonably discoverable by the
challenging party at the appropriate time for making such a motion;

(h) The order is
inconsistent with a rule of the agency unless the agency explains the
inconsistency by stating facts and reasons to demonstrate a rational basis for
inconsistency; ((or))

(i) The order is
arbitrary or capricious; or

(j) The order is
based on a de facto rule.

(4) Review of other
agency action.

(a) All agency action
not reviewable under subsection (2) or (3) of this section shall be reviewed
under this subsection.

(b) A person whose
rights are violated by an agency's failure to perform a duty that is required
by law to be performed may file a petition for review pursuant to RCW
34.05.514, seeking an order pursuant to this subsection requiring performance.
Within twenty days after service of the petition for review, the agency shall
file and serve an answer to the petition, made in the same manner as an answer
to a complaint in a civil action. The court may hear evidence, pursuant to RCW
34.05.562, on material issues of fact raised by the petition and answer.

(c) Relief for persons
aggrieved by the performance of an agency action, including the exercise of
discretion, or an action under (b) of this subsection can be granted only if
the court determines that the action is:

(i) Unconstitutional;

(ii) Outside the
statutory authority of the agency or the authority conferred by a provision of
law;

(iii) Arbitrary or
capricious; ((or))

(iv) Taken by persons
who were not properly constituted as agency officials lawfully entitled to take
such action; or

(v) Based on a de
facto rule.

PART
V

EQUAL ACCESS TO JUSTICE

Sec. 15. RCW 4.84.340 and 1995 c
403 s 902 are each amended to read as follows:

Unless the context
clearly requires otherwise, the definitions in this section apply throughout
RCW 4.84.340 through 4.84.360.

(1) "Adjudicative
proceeding" means an adjudicative proceeding as defined in RCW 34.05.010
and an administrative review under RCW 34.05.464. RCW 4.84.340 through
4.84.360 and sections 18 and 19 of this act apply only to the following
adjudicative proceedings:

(a) Cases conducted
for the department of social and health services, but excluding the division of
child support and the division of juvenile rehabilitation;

(b) Licensing cases
conducted for the liquor control board;

(c) Business and
professional licensing cases for the department of licensing, but excluding
motor vehicle franchise cases under chapter 46.96 RCW;

(d) Business and
professional licensing cases for the department of labor and industries;

(e) Employer
assessment and penalty cases conducted under chapters 49.17, 51.48, and 51.52
RCW for the department of labor and industries; and

(f) Employer
assessment and penalty cases conducted under chapter 50.24 RCW for the
employment security department.

(2)
"Administrative review" means an adjudicative proceeding under RCW
34.05.464.

(3)
"Administrative tribunal" means an independent agency that conducts
adjudicative proceedings, as defined in RCW 34.05.010, as its sole or principal
duty, to: (a) Review decisions of another agency or governmental unit; or (b)
resolve disputes in which the tribunal is not a party.

(4)
"Agency" means any state board, commission, department, institution
of higher education, or officer, authorized by law to make rules or to conduct
adjudicative proceedings, except those in the legislative or judicial branches,
the governor, or the attorney general except to the extent otherwise required by
law.

(((2))) (5)
"Agency action" means agency action as defined by chapter 34.05 RCW.

(((3))) (6)
"Fees and other expenses" includes the reasonable expenses of expert
witnesses, the reasonable cost of a study, analysis, engineering report, test,
or project that is found by the court, presiding officer, or reviewing
officer to be necessary for the preparation of the party's case, and
reasonable attorneys' fees. Reasonable attorneys' fees shall be based on the
prevailing market rates for the kind and quality of services furnished, except
that (a) no expert witness shall be compensated at a rate in excess of the
highest rates of compensation for expert witnesses paid by the state of
Washington, and (b) attorneys' fees shall not be awarded in excess of one hundred
fifty dollars per hour unless the court, presiding officer, or reviewing
officer determines that an increase in the cost of living or a special
factor, such as the limited availability of qualified attorneys for the
proceedings involved, justifies a higher fee.

(((4))) (7)
"Judicial review" means ((a judicial review as defined by chapter
34.05 RCW)) review of an agency action in the superior court and courts
of appeal.

(8) "Presiding
officer" means a presiding officer under RCW 34.05.425.

(9) "Qualified
administrative party" means (a) an individual whose net worth did not
exceed two hundred fifty thousand dollars at the time the initial petition for
an adjudicatory proceeding was filed, or (b) a sole owner of an unincorporated
business, or a partnership, corporation, association, or organization whose net
worth did not exceed one million two hundred fifty thousand dollars at the time
the initial petition for an adjudicatory proceeding was filed, except that an
organization described in section 501(c)(3) of the federal Internal Revenue
Code of 1954 as exempt from taxation under section 501(a) of the code and a
cooperative association as defined in section 15(a) of the Agricultural
Marketing Act (12 U.S.C. 1141J(a)), may be a party regardless of the net worth
of the organization or cooperative association.

(((5))) (10)
"Qualified judicial party" means (a) an individual whose net
worth did not exceed one million dollars at the time the initial petition for
judicial review was filed, or (b) a sole owner of an unincorporated
business, or a partnership, corporation, association, or organization whose net
worth did not exceed five million dollars at the time the initial petition for
judicial review was filed, except that an organization described in section
501(c)(3) of the federal Internal Revenue Code of 1954 as
exempt from taxation under section 501(a) of the code and a cooperative
association as defined in section 15(a) of the Agricultural Marketing
Act (12 U.S.C. 1141J(a)), may be a party regardless of the net worth of
such organization or cooperative association.

(11) "Qualified
party" means a qualified judicial party or a qualified administrative
party.

(12) "Reviewing
officer" means a reviewing officer under RCW 34.05.464.

Sec. 16. RCW 4.84.350 and 1995 c
403 s 903 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) Except as otherwise
specifically provided by statute, a court shall award a qualified judicial
party that prevails in a judicial review of an agency action and a presiding
officer or reviewing officer shall award a qualified administrative party that
prevails in an adjudicative proceeding challenging an agency action, fees
and other expenses, including reasonable attorneys' fees, unless the court,
presiding officer, or reviewing officer finds that the agency action was
substantially justified or that circumstances make an award unjust. A
qualified party ((shall be)) is considered to have prevailed if
the qualified party obtained relief on a significant issue that achieves some
benefit that the qualified party sought.

(2) The amount awarded
a qualified party under subsection (1) of this section ((shall)) may
not exceed twenty-five thousand dollars for the total request for the
combined proceedings, administrative hearing, or administrative review, and may
not exceed fifty thousand dollars for the fees and other expenses incurred in
superior court, and fifty thousand dollars for the fees and other expenses
incurred in each court of appeal, but not to exceed a total award for judicial
expenses of seventy-five thousand dollars. Subsection (1) of this section
shall not apply unless all parties challenging the agency action are qualified
parties. If two or more qualified parties join in an action, the award in
total ((shall)) may not exceed twenty-five thousand dollars in
the superior court. The court, presiding officer, or reviewing officer,
in its discretion, may reduce the amount to be awarded pursuant to subsection
(1) of this section, or deny any award, to the extent that a qualified party
during the course of the proceedings engaged in conduct that unduly or
unreasonably protracted the final resolution of the matter in controversy.

(3) The agencies
that conduct their own administrative hearings or administrative reviews under
chapter 34.05 RCW, the chief administrative law judge of the office of
administrative hearings, and the board of industrial insurance appeals are
authorized to adopt rules to implement RCW 4.84.340 through 4.84.360 and sections
18 and 19 of this act. These rules may include reasonable requirements for
notices of appearances by authorized representatives, requirements for notices
of intent to seek fees under this section, limitations on the eligibility for
fees for nonattorney representatives, and a schedule for hours, rates, or
limitations on amounts of fees and other expenses presumed reasonable for the
type of adjudicative proceeding. In addition, rules may set a maximum total
amount including all fees and expenses for specific types of adjudicative
proceedings.

Sec. 17. RCW 4.84.360 and 1995 c
403 s 904 are each amended to read as follows:

Fees and other expenses
awarded under RCW 4.84.340 and 4.84.350 ((shall)) must be paid by
the agency over which the party prevails from operating funds appropriated to
the agency within ((sixty)) thirty days. The fees and other
expenses must be paid from moneys appropriated to the agency for administration
and support services, and not from moneys appropriated for program activities
or service delivery, if the operating budget or budget notes specifically
designate administrative and support services. Agencies paying fees and
other expenses pursuant to RCW 4.84.340 and 4.84.350 shall report all payments
to the office of financial management within five days of paying the fees and
other expenses. Fees and other expenses awarded by the court ((shall be)),
presiding officer, or reviewing officer are subject to ((the provisions
of)) chapter 39.76 RCW and ((shall)) must be deemed payable
on the date the court, presiding officer, or reviewing officer announces
the award.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
18. A new section is added
to chapter 4.84 RCW to read as follows:

When an agency has made
an offer to participate in an alternative dispute resolution process, the
appellant must participate in good faith or be precluded from applying for an
award of attorneys' fees or expenses under RCW 4.84.340 through 4.84.360, this
section, and section 19 of this act.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
19. A new section is added
to chapter 4.84 RCW to read as follows:

No fees or other
expenses may be awarded against an administrative tribunal.

PART
VI

TECHNICAL ASSISTANCE PROGRAMS

NEW SECTION. Sec.
20. A new section is added
to chapter 34.05 RCW to read as follows:

(1) Within two hundred
days after the effective date of a rule that imposes additional requirements on
businesses, the violation of which subjects a person to a penalty, assessment,
or administrative sanction, an agency shall make a good faith effort to notify
businesses affected by the rule of the requirements of the rule and how to
obtain technical assistance to comply.

(2) For purposes of
this section, the agency has made a good faith effort to notify businesses
affected by the rule if:

(a) The agency at least
notifies businesses in the standard industrial classifications registered with
the department of revenue that are identified in the rule-making file as
businesses affected by the rule; or

(b) For rules imposing
additional requirements only on persons or firms licensed, registered, or
operating under a permit, the agency notifies the persons or firms holding the
license, registration, or permit.

(3) Inadvertent failure
to notify a specific person or business under this section does not invalidate
a rule.

Sec. 21. RCW 43.05.040 and 1995 c
403 s 605 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) The owner
and operator shall be given a reasonable period of time to correct violations
identified during a technical assistance visit before any civil penalty
provided for by law is imposed for those violations. A regulatory agency may
revisit a facility, business, or other location after a technical assistance
visit and a reasonable period of time has passed to correct violations
identified by the agency in writing and issue civil penalties as provided for
by law for any uncorrected violations.

(2) During a visit
under subsection (1) of this section, the regulatory agency may not issue civil
penalties:

(a) For violations
not previously identified in a technical assistance visit, unless the
violations are of the type for which the agency may issue a citation during a
technical assistance visit under RCW 43.05.050; or

(b) If the owner or
operator has made a good faith effort to comply with the agency's statement of
what is required for compliance under RCW 43.05.030(3)(b).

(3) During a visit
under subsection (1) of this section, if the regulatory agency identifies
violations for which it may not issue civil penalties under subsection (2) of
this section, the agency shall treat the visit as a technical assistance visit
and notify the owner or operator of the violations under RCW 43.05.030(3)(a).

(4) This section
does not apply to citations issued by the department of labor and industries
under RCW 43.05.090.

Sec. 22. RCW 43.05.030 and 1996 c
206 s 2 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) For the purposes of
this chapter, a technical assistance visit is a visit by a regulatory agency to
a facility, business, or other location that:

(a) Has been requested
or is voluntarily accepted; and

(b) Is declared by the
regulatory agency at the beginning of the visit to be a technical assistance
visit.

(2) A technical
assistance visit also includes:

(a) A
consultative visit pursuant to RCW 49.17.250; and

(b) A visit during
which the agency identifies violations for which it may not issue civil
penalties under RCW 43.05.040(2).

(3) During a technical
assistance visit, or within a reasonable time thereafter, a regulatory agency
shall inform the owner or operator of the facility of any violations of law or
agency rules identified by the agency as follows:

(a) A description of
the condition that is not in compliance and the text of the specific section or
subsection of the applicable state or federal law or rule;

(b) A statement of what
is required to achieve compliance;

(c) The date by which
the agency requires compliance to be achieved;

(d) Notice of the means
to contact any technical assistance services provided by the agency or others;
and

(e) Notice of when,
where, and to whom a request to extend the time to achieve compliance for good
cause may be filed with the agency.

PART
VII

LEGISLATIVE REVIEW

Sec. 23. RCW 34.05.610 and 1998 c
280 s 9 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) There is hereby
created a joint administrative rules review committee which shall be a
bipartisan committee consisting of the lieutenant governor, four
senators, and four representatives from the state legislature. The
lieutenant governor shall serve as a nonvoting committee member unless there is
a tie vote among the members voting on an issue, in which case the lieutenant
governor may vote to break the tie. The senate members of the committee
shall be appointed by the president of the senate, and the house members of the
committee shall be appointed by the speaker of the house. Not more than two
members from each house may be from the same political party. The appointing
authorities shall also appoint one alternate member from each caucus of each
house. All appointments to the committee are subject to approval by the
caucuses to which the appointed members belong.

(2) Members and
alternates shall be appointed as soon as possible after the legislature
convenes in regular session in an odd-numbered year, and their terms shall
extend until their successors are appointed and qualified at the next regular
session of the legislature in an odd-numbered year or until such persons no
longer serve in the legislature, whichever occurs first. Members and
alternates may be reappointed to the committee.

(3) On or about January
1, 1999, the president of the senate shall appoint the chairperson and the vice
chairperson from among the committee membership. The speaker of the house
shall appoint the chairperson and the vice chairperson in alternating
even-numbered years beginning in the year 2000 from among the committee
membership. The secretary of the senate shall appoint the chairperson and the
vice chairperson in the alternating even-numbered years beginning in the year
2002 from among the committee membership. Such appointments shall be made in
January of each even-numbered year as soon as possible after a legislative
session convenes.

(4) The chairperson of
the committee shall cause all meeting notices and committee documents to be
sent to the members and alternates. A vacancy shall be filled by appointment
of a legislator from the same political party as the original appointment. The
appropriate appointing authority shall make the appointment within thirty days
of the vacancy occurring.

Sec. 24. RCW 34.05.630 and 1998 c
21 s 1 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) All rules required
to be filed pursuant to RCW 34.05.380, and emergency rules adopted pursuant to
RCW 34.05.350, are subject to selective review by the committee.

(2) All agency policy
and interpretive statements, guidelines, and documents that are of general
applicability, or their equivalents, are subject to selective review by the
committee to determine whether or not a statement, guideline, or document that
is of general applicability, or its equivalent, is being used as a rule that
has not been adopted in accordance with all applicable provisions of law.

(3) If the rules review
committee finds by a majority vote of its members: (a) That an existing rule
is not within the intent of the legislature as expressed by the statute which
the rule implements, (b) that the rule has not been adopted in accordance with
all applicable provisions of law, or (c) that an agency is using a policy or
interpretive statement in place of a rule, the agency affected shall be
notified of such finding and the reasons therefor. Within thirty days of the
receipt of the rules review committee's notice, the agency shall file notice of
a hearing on the rules review committee's finding with the code reviser and
mail notice to all persons who have made timely request of the agency for
advance notice of its rule-making proceedings as provided in RCW 34.05.320.
The agency's notice shall include the rules review committee's findings and
reasons therefor, and shall be published in the Washington state register in
accordance with the provisions of chapter 34.08 RCW.

(4) The agency shall
conduct the hearing within ninety days of receiving the rules review
committee's finding. The agency shall consider fully all written and oral
submissions regarding (a) whether the rule in question is within the intent of
the legislature as expressed by the statute which the rule implements, (b)
whether the rule was adopted in accordance with all applicable provisions of
law, and (c) whether the agency is using a policy or interpretive statement, guideline,
or document that is of general applicability, or its equivalent, in place of a
rule.

Sec. 25. RCW 34.05.640 and 1998 c
21 s 2 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) Within seven days
of an agency hearing held after notification of the agency by the rules review
committee pursuant to RCW 34.05.620 or 34.05.630, the affected agency shall
notify the committee of its intended action on a proposed or existing rule to which
the committee objected or on a committee finding of the agency's failure to
adopt rules.

(2) If the rules review
committee finds by a majority vote of its members: (a) That the proposed or
existing rule in question will not be modified, amended, withdrawn, or repealed
by the agency so as to conform with the intent of the legislature, (b) that an
existing rule was not adopted in accordance with all applicable provisions of
law, or (c) that the agency will not replace the policy or interpretive statement,
guideline, or document that is of general applicability, or its equivalent,
with a rule, the rules review committee may((, within thirty days from
notification by the agency of its intended action,)) file with the code
reviser notice of its objections together with a concise statement of the
reasons therefor. Such notice and statement shall also be provided to the
agency by the rules review committee.

(3)(a) If the rules
review committee makes an adverse finding regarding an existing rule under
subsection (2)(a) or (b) of this section, the committee may, by a majority vote
of its members, recommend suspension of the rule. Within seven days of such
vote the committee shall transmit to the appropriate standing committees of the
legislature, the governor, the code reviser, and the agency written notice of
its objection and recommended suspension and the concise reasons therefor.
Within thirty days of receipt of the notice, the governor shall transmit to the
committee, the code reviser, and the agency written approval or disapproval of
the recommended suspension. If the suspension is approved by the governor, it
is effective from the date of that approval and continues until ninety days
after the expiration of the next regular legislative session.

(b) If the rules review
committee makes an adverse finding regarding a policy or interpretive
statement, guideline, or document that is of general applicability, or its
equivalent, under subsection (2)(c) of this section, the committee may, by a
majority vote of its members, advise the governor of its finding.

(4) The code reviser
shall publish transmittals from the rules review committee or the governor
issued pursuant to subsection (2) or (3) of this section in the Washington
state register and shall publish in the next supplement and compilation of the
Washington Administrative Code a reference to the committee's objection or
recommended suspension and the governor's action on it and to the issue of the
Washington state register in which the full text thereof appears.

(5) The reference shall
be removed from a rule published in the Washington Administrative Code if a
subsequent adjudicatory proceeding determines that the rule is within the
intent of the legislature or was adopted in accordance with all applicable
laws, whichever was the objection of the rules review committee.

Sec. 26. RCW 34.05.660 and 1988 c
288 s 606 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) Except as
provided in subsection (2) of this section, it is the express policy of the
legislature that establishment of procedures for review of administrative rules
by the legislature and the notice of objection required by RCW 34.05.630(((2)))
(3) and 34.05.640(2) in no way serves to establish a presumption as to
the legality or constitutionality of a rule in any subsequent judicial
proceedings interpreting such rules.

(2) If the joint
administrative rules review committee recommends to the governor that an
existing rule be suspended because it does not conform with the intent of the
legislature or was not adopted in accordance with all applicable provisions of
law, the recommendation establishes a rebuttable presumption in a proceeding
challenging the validity of the rule that the rule is invalid. The burden of
demonstrating the validity of the rule is then on the adopting agency.

PART
VIII

LOCAL GOVERNMENT IMPACT