BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF
WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec.
1. A new section is added
to chapter 81.112 RCW to read as follows:

(1) Every authority
created under this chapter must place a proposition on the ballot for the
November 2001 general election that requires voters to decide whether to
dissolve the authority or allow for its continued operation. If the voters
approve a dissolution of the authority, taxes levied under chapter 81.104 RCW
at the time of the vote remain in effect and will be distributed as follows:

(a) One-third of all
taxes collected under chapter 81.104 RCW for the authority will be divided and
distributed equally between the city and county in which the authority is
located to be used only for public road improvements within the boundary of the
authority. If multiple cities and/or counties are within the boundary of the
authority, the taxes must be divided in proportion to their respective
populations within the boundary of the authority. All taxes distributed shall
be spent by the recipient city or county for public road improvements within
the boundaries of that city or county which are also within the boundary of the
authority;

(b) One-third of all
taxes collected under chapter 81.104 RCW for the authority will be distributed
to cities that operate transit systems, county transportation authorities,
metropolitan municipal corporations, and public transportation benefit areas in
proportion to their respective populations. All taxes so distributed shall be
spent by the recipient cities that operate transit systems, county
transportation authorities, metropolitan municipal corporations, and public
transportation benefit areas for operations or improvements within that
entity's boundaries which are also within the boundary of the authority; and

(c) One-third to the
state for use only on state road improvements within the boundary of the
authority.

(2) The ballot
proposition requesting voters within an authority to vote on its dissolution
must contain in substance the following:

"Shall . . . . .
(insert name of authority) be dissolved and all taxes collected on its behalf
be distributed as follows:

1. One-third of all
taxes collected for the authority will be divided and distributed equally
between the city and county in which the authority is located to be used only
for public road improvements within the boundary of the authority. If multiple
cities and/or counties are within the boundary of the authority, the taxes will
be divided accordingly;

2. One-third of all
taxes collected for the authority will be distributed to all cities that
operate transit systems, county transportation authorities, metropolitan
municipal corporations, and public transportation benefit areas in proportion
to their respective populations, for improvements and operations within the
boundary of the authority; and

3. One-third to the
state for use only on state road improvements within the boundary of the
authority?

Yes...................... G

No....................... G"

(3) Each
voter must indicate "Yes" or "No" on his or her ballot in
accordance with the procedures established under Title 29 RCW.

--- END ---