BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF
WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec.
1. The legislature
recognizes that maintaining a sufficient amount of land designated as, and
suitable for, urban development within the comprehensive plans of counties and
cities planning under RCW 36.70A.040 is essential if the purposes of chapter
36.70A RCW are to be achieved. The legislature therefore finds that a
reduction in the amount of such land in a county, through the expansion of
designated critical areas, the revision of development regulations on existing
designated critical areas, or new regulation of existing developable lands
under local, state, or federal environmental laws, should be offset by the
addition of other land classified as, and suitable for, urban development to a
county's urban growth areas. That is, when adoption of new standards of
environmental protection for urban lands is necessary in the public interest,
the purposes of chapter 36.70A RCW are best achieved if the total amount of
land available for productive human activities within the designated urban
growth areas of counties is not thereby diminished.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
2. A new section is added
to chapter 36.70A RCW to read as follows:

(1) If, after January
1, 2001, a county or city planning under RCW 36.70A.040 either amends its
comprehensive plan to redesignate as critical areas land located within an
urban growth area and previously designated otherwise in its comprehensive plan
land use element under RCW 36.70A.070(1) or amends its development regulations
or other standards that effectively reduces the development potential of land
within its urban growth area and designated for development in its
comprehensive plan:

(a) That county or city
shall determine the acreage and qualitative reduction in land suitable for
development within its urban growth area and shall docket that amount as a
deficiency to the planning director of the county in which the land is located;

(b) Not later than
September 1, 2002, and at least every five years thereafter, each county, in
consultation with its cities as required by RCW 36.70A.110 and 36.70A.210,
shall increase the total land area within its urban growth areas by the full
docketed acreage deficiency, with comparable qualitative land characteristics,
through amendment of the county's comprehensive plan; and

(c) The county within
which the increased land suitable for urban development is located shall
review its comprehensive plan elements under RCW 36.70A.070 and its development
regulations under RCW 36.70A.060 and shall adopt any amendments necessary to
assure that the comprehensive plan elements and development regulations are
consistent with the changes required by (b) of this subsection.

(2) The revision
required by this section may be combined with, but shall not be delayed by, the
review required under RCW 36.70A.130(3) or with the review and evaluation
required under RCW 36.70A.215.

(3) For purposes of
this section, "docketing" means compiling and maintaining a detailed
list of land and land use deficiencies resulting from the actions specified in
subsection (1) of this section in a manner that will ensure that such
deficiencies will be presented for the required periodic action by counties and
will be available for review by the public.

(4) For
purposes of this section, "qualitative land characteristics" means
the designated use of the land in deficiency, its suitability for development,
the general location of that land within the county, its physical
characteristics, and the availability of urban services for the land.

---
END ---