BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF
WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1. RCW 79A.25.070 and 2000
c 11 s 73 are each amended to read as follows:

Upon
expiration of the time limited by RCW 82.36.330 for claiming of refunds of tax
on marine fuel, the state of Washington shall succeed to the right to such
refunds. The director of licensing, after taking into account past and
anticipated claims for refunds from and deposits to the marine fuel tax refund
account and the costs of carrying out the provisions of RCW 79A.25.030, shall
request the state treasurer to transfer ((monthly from the marine fuel tax
refund account an amount equal to the proportion of the moneys in the account
representing the motor vehicle fuel tax rate under RCW 82.36.025 in effect on
January 1, 1990, to the recreation resource account and the remainder to the
motor vehicle fund)) to the recreation resource account the moneys in
the marine fuel tax refund account that are not required for payment of the
refund claims or costs, and the state treasurer shall make the transfer.

--- END ---