BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF
WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec.
1. (1) The department of
social and health services division of alcohol and substance abuse, the
Washington state institute of public policy, and the Washington state council
on problem gambling shall conduct a study to determine the extent to which
persons receiving public treatment under chapter 70.96A RCW are also problem or
pathological gamblers.

(2) The institute shall
issue a final report by December 1, 2002.

(3) This
section expires January 1, 2003.

---
END ---