BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF
WASHINGTON:

_5 Sec. 1. RCW
43.250.010 and 1996 c 268 s 1 are each amended to read

_6 as follows:

_7 The purpose of this chapter is to enable political

_8 subdivisions, community and technical college districts,
((and))

_9 the state board for community and technical colleges as

10 established in chapter 28B.50 RCW, and public
four-year

11 institutions of higher education to participate
with the state in

12 providing maximum opportunities for the investment of
surplus

13 public funds consistent with the safety and protection
of such

14 funds. The legislature finds and declares that the
public interest

15 is found in providing maximum prudent investment of
surplus funds,

16 thereby reducing the need for additional taxation. The
legislature

17 also recognizes that not all political subdivisions are
able to

18 maximize the return on their temporary surplus funds.
The

p. 1 HB
1623

_1 legislature therefore provides in this chapter a
mechanism whereby

_2 political subdivisions, community and technical
colleges, ((and))

_3 the state board for community and technical colleges,
and public

_4 four-year institutions of higher education may,
at their option,

_5 utilize the resources of the state treasurer's office to
maximize

_6 the potential of surplus funds while ensuring the safety
of public

_7 funds.

_8 Sec. 2. RCW
43.250.020 and 1996 c 268 s 2 are each amended to read

_9 as follows:

10 Unless the context clearly requires otherwise, the
definitions

11 in this section shall apply throughout this chapter.

12 (1) "Public funds investment account" or
"investment pool"

13 means the aggregate of all funds as defined in
subsection (5) of

14 this section that are placed in the custody of the state
treasurer

15 for investment and reinvestment.

16 (2) "Political subdivision" means any
county, city, town,

17 municipal corporation, political subdivision, or special
purpose

18 taxing district in the state.

19 (3) "Local government official" means any
officer or employee

20 of a political subdivision who has been designated by
statute or

21 by local charter, ordinance, or resolution as the
officer having

22 the authority to invest the funds of the political
subdivision.

23 However, the county treasurer shall be deemed the only
local

24 government official for all political subdivisions for
which the

25 county treasurer has exclusive statutory authority to
invest the

26 funds thereof.

27 (4) "Financial officer" means the
board-appointed treasurer of

28 a community or technical college district ((or)),
the state board

29 for community and technical colleges, or a public
four-year

30 institution of higher education.

31 (5) "Funds" means:

32 (a) Public funds under the control of or in the
custody of any

33 local government official or local funds, as defined by
the office

34 of financial management publication "Policies,
Regulations and

35 Procedures," under the control of or in the custody
of a financial

36 officer by virtue of the official's authority that are
not

37 immediately required to meet current demands;

HB 1623 p. 2

_1 (b) State funds deposited in the investment pool by
the state

_2 treasurer that are the proceeds of bonds, notes, or
other

_3 evidences of indebtedness authorized by the state
finance

_4 committee under chapter 39.42 RCW or payments pursuant
to

_5 financing contracts under chapter 39.94 RCW, when the
investments

_6 are made in order to comply with the Internal Revenue
Code of

_7 1986, as amended.

_8 Sec. 3. RCW
43.250.040 and 1996 c 268 s 3 are each amended to read

_9 as follows:

10 If authorized by statute, local ordinance, or
resolution, a

11 local government official or financial officer or his
or her

12 designee may place funds into the public funds
investment account

13 for investment and reinvestment by the state treasurer
in those

14 securities and investments set forth in RCW 43.84.080
and chapter

15 39.58 RCW. The state treasurer shall invest the funds
in such

16 manner as to effectively maximize the yield to the
investment

17 pool. In investing and reinvesting moneys in the public
funds

18 investment account and in acquiring, retaining,
managing, and

19 disposing of investments of the investment pool, there
shall be

20 exercised the judgment and care under the circumstances
then

21 prevailing which persons of prudence, discretion, and
intelligence

22 exercise in the management of their own affairs, not in
regard to

23 speculation but in regard to the permanent disposition
of the

24 funds considering the probable income as well as the
probable

25 safety of the capital.

‑‑‑ END ‑‑‑

p. 3 HB
1623