BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF
WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1. 1999 c 379 s 112
(uncodified) is amended to read as follows:

FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF COMMUNITY, TRADE, AND ECONOMIC
DEVELOPMENT

Development Loan Fund
(88-2-006) (00-2-004)

Reappropriation:

State Building
Construction Account‑-State...... $ 558,716

Washington State
Development Loan

Account‑-((State))
Federal............... $ 2,439,932

-------------

Subtotal
Reappropriation.................. $ 2,998,648

Appropriation:

Washington State
Development Loan

Account‑-((State))
Federal............... $ 3,500,000

Prior Biennia
(Expenditures).................... $ 805,237

Future Biennia
(Projected Costs)....... ........ $ 18,000,000

-------------

TOTAL.................................... $ 25,303,885

Sec. 2. 1999 c 379 s 758
(uncodified) is amended to read as follows:

FOR THE COMMUNITY AND TECHNICAL
COLLEGE SYSTEM

Minor Works: Program
(00-1-130)

The appropriation in
this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations:

(1) $350,000 is
provided for technical engineering analysis and financial planning regarding
the conversion to digital transmission for Washington public broadcast
stations. The financial plan shall assess state, federal, nonprofit
foundations, viewer donations, and other sources of revenue to implement the
conversion from analog to digital transmission. The provision of these study
funds do not imply a further commitment of funding by the state of Washington.

(2) Funding is provided
((from the state building construction account)) as capital project
matching funds to the following colleges: Wenatchee Valley, $250,000; Clark,
$250,000; Lake Washington, $300,000; Bellevue, $500,000; Walla Walla, $500,000;
Grays Harbor, $400,000. State funds shall be matched by an equal or greater
amount of nonstate moneys.

(3) Following the
allocation of funds for the projects in subsections (1) and (2) of this
section, the appropriations in this section shall support the detailed list of
projects maintained by the office of financial management.

Appropriation:

State Building
Construction Account‑-State...... $ 15,050,000

Community and Technical
Colleges Capital Projects

Account‑-State........................... $ 1,800,000

-------------

Subtotal
Appropriation................... $ 16,850,000

Prior Biennia
(Expenditures).................... $ 0

Future Biennia
(Projected Costs)................ $ 0

-------------

TOTAL.................................... $ 16,850,000

Sec. 3. 2000 2nd sp.s. c 1 s
1008 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:

FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF GENERAL
ADMINISTRATION

Legislative Building
Renovation

The appropriation in
this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations:

(1) The appropriation
in this section is subject to the review and allotment procedures under
sections 902 and 903, chapter 379, Laws of 1999.

(2) (($2,000,000))
$4,500,000 of the appropriation in this section is provided for ((design
of the interior rehabilitation and exterior preservation of)) earthquake-related
costs associated with the state legislative building ((consistent with
the recommendations of the commission on legislative building preservation and
renovation)). Funds in this subsection are also provided for planning ((and
development of)), developing, and securing relocation space for
current and future construction projects related to the capitol historic district
((as well as access)) and site improvements ((to the south portico
area)).

(3) The department,
in consultation with the legislature, the governor, and the state capitol
committee, shall immediately begin planning and initiate an accelerated
design/construction schedule for the renovation of the state legislative
building as follows:

(a) No new permanent
buildings shall be constructed, and the department shall follow standards for
historic preservation;

(b) The goal shall
be to reoccupy the building in time for the 2004 legislative session;

(c) The department
shall make temporary accommodations for the displacement of legislators and
legislative staff. Functionally, the house of representatives shall be
accommodated in the John L. O'Brien building and the Pritchard building while
the senate shall be accommodated in the Cherberg building and the Newhouse
building. It is intended that the chambers of the house of representatives,
house of representatives members and staff, and other legislative functions be
located in the Pritchard building;

(d) The department
shall temporarily move the state library to the Sunset Life building by June
30, 2001, and, if needed, the department shall lease storage facilities in
Thurston county for books and other library assets;

(e) The department
shall make temporary accommodations for other tenants of the state legislative
building as follows:

(i) The office of
the governor shall be moved to the insurance building;

(ii) The office of
the code reviser and the lieutenant governor shall be moved to a location on
the west capitol campus; and

(iii) The other
tenants, including the office of the state treasurer, the office of the state
auditor, and the office of the secretary of state shall be moved to leased
space in Thurston county;

(f) The state
legislative building shall be completely vacated by September 15, 2001, to make
it available for renovation by the contractor; and

(g) State contracts
for the legislative building renovation, Nisqually earthquake repair, and future
earthquake mitigation shall conform to all rules, regulations, and requirements
of the federal emergency management agency.

(4) $1,000,000
of the appropriation in this section is provided for associated studies
including:

(a) A private financing
feasibility study;

(b) An investigation of
exterior sandstone attachment; and

(c) A space use
programming study to include:

(i) A prioritization of
uses within the legislative building based on functional affiliation with the
legislative process and the ceremonial functions of state-wide office holders
that takes into consideration emerging telecommunication capabilities;

(ii) An analysis of
space efficiency and space use related to legislative and state-wide ceremonial
functions in the following buildings: Cherberg, O'Brien, Pritchard, Newhouse,
the governor's mansion, and insurance;

(iii) A review of
alternative uses and expansion capabilities for buildings on the capitol
campus; and

(iv) By November 30,
2000, the department shall submit a report to the appropriate committees of the
legislature on the recommendations of the space use programming study. These
recommendations shall be the basis for the planning and development of
relocation space for the capitol historic district ((as specified in subsection
(2) of this section)).

(((4))) (5)
The state capitol committee, in conjunction with a legislative building
renovation oversight committee consisting of two members from both the house of
representatives and senate, each appointed by legislative leadership, shall:

(a) Develop
criteria and guidelines for the space programming study; and

(b) Periodically
advise the department regarding the renovation under subsection (3) of this
section, the receipt and use of private funds, and other issues that may arise.

(((5))) (6)
From the appropriation in this section, up to $10,000 or an amount based on an
appraised value may be expended to acquire a photo and document collection of
historic significance that depicts legislative activities and facilities.

(7) The department
shall report on the progress of accelerated planning, design, and relocations
related to the renovation of the state legislative building to the legislature
and the governor by July 15, 2001, and September 15, 2001, and shall consult
with the legislature and governor on major decisions.

Appropriation:

Capitol Building
Construction Account...... $ 3,000,000

Thurston County
Facilities Account......... $ 2,500,000

-------------

Subtotal
Appropriation.............. $ 5,500,000

Prior Biennia
(Expenditures)............... $ 0

Future Biennia
(Projected Costs)........... $ 102,500,000

-------------

TOTAL............................... $ ((105,500,000))

108,000,000

Sec. 4. 2000 2nd sp.s. c 1 s
1013 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:

FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF SOCIAL AND
HEALTH SERVICES

Special Commitment Center:
Phase I (00-2-001)

The appropriation in
this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations:

(1) The appropriation
in this section is subject to the review and allotment procedures under
sections 902 and 903, chapter 379, Laws of 1999.

(2) The appropriation
in this section is provided for design, sitework, and construction costs
associated with building the first ((48-bed)) housing unit for the
special commitment center located at McNeil Island. The department of social
and health services shall notify the office of financial management and the
legislative fiscal committees if there are changes to the scheduled March 2002
occupancy date.

(3) Within the funds
provided in this section, the department of social and health services shall
evaluate options and site locations for less restrictive alternative
placements. The department of social and health services shall provide a
report to the office of financial management and the legislative fiscal
committees detailing the results of this evaluation, including statutory
changes necessary to implement preferred options, by November 15, 2000.

Appropriation:

State Building
Construction Account‑-State...... $ 14,000,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures).................... $ 0

Future Biennia
(Projected Costs)................ $ 50,000,000

-------------

TOTAL.................................... $ 64,000,000

NEW SECTION. Sec.
5. A new section is added
to 1999 c 379 (uncodified) to read as follows:

FOR THE UNIVERSITY OF WASHINGTON

UW Tacoma Land
Acquisition (01-2-029)

Appropriation:

Education Construction
Account‑-State........... $ 2,500,000

Prior Biennia
(Expenditures).................... $ 0

Future Biennia
(Projected Costs)................ $ 4,000,000

-------------

TOTAL.................................... $ 6,500,000

Sec. 6. 1999 c 379 s 937
(uncodified) is amended to read as follows:

FOR THE COMMUNITY AND TECHNICAL
COLLEGE SYSTEM

Highline Community College
- Classroom/Laboratory Building: Construction (98-2-660)

The appropriations in
this section are subject to the review and allotment procedures under sections
902 and 903 of this act.

Reappropriation:

State Building
Construction Account‑-State...... $ 310,000

Appropriation:

State Building
Construction Account‑-State...... $ 5,900,000

Education Construction
Account‑-State............... $ 1,315,000

-------------

Subtotal
Appropriation................... $ 7,215,000

Prior Biennia
(Expenditures).................... $ 79,717

Future Biennia
(Projected Costs)................ $ 0

-------------

TOTAL.................................... $ ((6,289,717))

7,604,717

NEW SECTION. Sec.
7. If any provision of this
act or its application to any person or circumstance is held invalid, the
remainder of the act or the application of the provision to other persons or
circumstances is not affected.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 8. This act is necessary for
the immediate preservation of the public peace, health, or safety, or support
of the state government and its existing public institutions, and takes effect
immediately.

---
END ---