BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF
WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1. RCW 36.70A.367 and 1998
c 289 s 2 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) In addition to the
major industrial development allowed under RCW 36.70A.365, a county ((required
or choosing to plan)) planning under RCW 36.70A.040 that meets the
criteria in subsection (9) of this section may establish, in consultation with
cities consistent with provisions of RCW 36.70A.210, a process for designating
a bank of no more than two master planned locations for major industrial
activity outside urban growth areas.

(2) A master planned
location for major industrial developments outside an urban growth area may be
included in the urban industrial land bank for the county if criteria
including, but not limited to, the following are met:

(a) New infrastructure
is provided for and/or applicable impact fees are paid;

(b) Transit-oriented
site planning and traffic demand management programs are implemented;

(c) Buffers are
provided between the major industrial development and adjacent nonurban areas;

(d) Environmental
protection including air and water quality has been addressed and provided for;

(e) Development
regulations are established to ensure that urban growth will not occur in
adjacent nonurban areas;

(f) Provision is made
to mitigate adverse impacts on designated agricultural lands, forest lands, and
mineral resource lands;

(g) The plan for the
major industrial development is consistent with the county's development
regulations established for protection of critical areas; ((and))

(h) An inventory of
developable land has been conducted as provided in RCW 36.70A.365; and

(i) Development
regulations require the industrial land bank site to be used primarily for
locating industrial and manufacturing businesses and specify that the gross
floor area of all commercial and service buildings or facilities locating
within the industrial land bank shall not exceed ten percent of the total gross
floor area of buildings or facilities in the industrial land bank. The
commercial and service businesses operated within the ten percent gross floor
area limit should be supportive of or complementary to the primary industrial
or manufacturing businesses within the industrial land bank. The commercial
and service businesses should be established concurrently with or subsequent to
the industrial or manufacturing businesses.

(3) In selecting master
planned locations for inclusion in the urban industrial land bank, priority
shall be given to locations that are adjacent to, or in close proximity to, an
urban growth area.

(4) Final approval of
inclusion of a master planned location in the urban industrial land bank shall
be considered an adopted amendment to the comprehensive plan adopted pursuant
to RCW 36.70A.070, except that RCW 36.70A.130(2) does not apply so that
inclusion or exclusion of master planned locations may be considered at any
time.

(5) Once a master
planned location has been included in the urban industrial land bank,
manufacturing and industrial businesses that qualify as major industrial
development under RCW 36.70A.365 may be located there.

(6) Nothing in this
section may be construed to alter the requirements for a county to comply with
chapter 43.21C RCW.

(7) The authority of a
county to engage in the process of including or excluding master planned
locations from the urban industrial land bank shall terminate on December 31,
((1999)) 2007. However, any location included in the urban
industrial land bank on or before December 31, ((1999)) 2007,
shall remain available for major industrial development as long as the criteria
of subsection (2) of this section continue to be met. A county that has
established or proposes to establish an industrial land bank pursuant to this
section shall review the need for an industrial land bank within the county,
including a review of the availability of land for industrial and manufacturing
uses within the urban growth area, during the review and evaluation of
comprehensive plans and development regulations required by RCW 36.70A.130.

(8) For the purposes of
this section, "major industrial development" means a master planned
location suitable for manufacturing or industrial businesses that: (a)
Requires a parcel of land so large that no suitable parcels are available
within an urban growth area; or (b) is a natural resource-based industry
requiring a location near agricultural land, forest land, or mineral resource
land upon which it is dependent; or (c) requires a location with
characteristics such as proximity to transportation facilities or related
industries such that there is no suitable location in an urban growth area.
The major industrial development may not be for the purpose of retail
commercial development or multitenant office parks.

(9) This section
applies to a county that at the time the process is established under
subsection (1) of this section:

(a) Has a population
greater than two hundred fifty thousand and is part of a metropolitan area that
includes a city in another state with a population greater than two hundred
fifty thousand;

(b) Has a population
greater than one hundred forty thousand and is adjacent to another country; or

(c) Has a population
greater than forty thousand but less than seventy-five thousand and has an
average level of unemployment for the preceding three years that exceeds the
average state unemployment for those years by twenty percent; and

(i) Is bordered by the
Pacific Ocean; or

(ii) Is located in the
Interstate 5 or Interstate 90 corridor.

(10)
Any location included in an industrial land bank pursuant to section 2, chapter
289, Laws of 1998, section 1, chapter 402, Laws of 1997, and section 2, chapter
167, Laws of 1996 shall remain available for major industrial development
according to this section as long as the criteria of subsection (2) of this
section continue to be satisfied.

--- END ---