BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF
WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1. RCW 84.34.230 and 1995 c
318 s 8 are each amended to read as follows:

Conservation futures
are a useful tool for counties to preserve lands of public interest for future
generations. Counties are encouraged to use conservation futures as one tool
for salmon restoration purposes.

For the purpose of
acquiring conservation futures ((as well as)) and other rights
and interests in real property pursuant to RCW 84.34.210 and 84.34.220, a
county may levy an amount not to exceed ((six and one-quarter)) ten
cents per thousand dollars of assessed valuation against the assessed valuation
of all taxable property within the county. The limitations in RCW 84.52.043
shall not apply to the tax levy authorized in this section. Any rights or
interests in real property acquired under this section must be located within
the assessing county.

Sec. 2. RCW 84.34.240 and 1971
ex.s. c 243 s 5 are each amended to read as follows:

Conservation futures
are a useful tool for counties to preserve lands of public interest for future
generations. Counties are encouraged to use conservation futures as one tool
for salmon restoration purposes.

Any ((board of))
county ((commissioners)) legislative authority may establish by
resolution a special fund which may be termed a conservation futures fund to
which it may credit all taxes levied pursuant to RCW 84.34.230. Amounts placed
in this fund ((may)) must be used ((solely)) for the
purpose of acquiring rights and interests in real property pursuant to the
terms of RCW 84.34.210 and 84.34.220. Nothing in this section shall be
construed as limiting in any manner methods and funds otherwise available to a
county for financing the acquisition of such rights and interests in real
property. Any rights or interests in real property acquired under this
section must be located within the assessing county.

Nothing
in this section may be construed as limiting in any manner methods and funds
otherwise available to a county for financing the acquisition of such rights
and interests in real property.

---
END ---