BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF
WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1. RCW 82.14.370 and 1999 c
311 s 101 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) The legislative
authority of a rural county may impose a sales and use tax in accordance with
the terms of this chapter. The tax is in addition to other taxes authorized by
law and shall be collected from those persons who are taxable by the state
under chapters 82.08 and 82.12 RCW upon the occurrence of any taxable event
within the county. The rate of tax shall not exceed 0.08 percent of the
selling price in the case of a sales tax or value of the article used in the
case of a use tax, except that for rural counties with population densities
between sixty and one hundred persons per square mile, the rate shall not
exceed 0.04 percent before January 1, 2000.

(2) The tax imposed
under subsection (1) of this section shall be deducted from the amount of tax
otherwise required to be collected or paid over to the department of revenue
under chapter 82.08 or 82.12 RCW. The department of revenue shall perform the
collection of such taxes on behalf of the county at no cost to the county.

(3) Moneys collected
under this section shall only be used for the purpose of financing public
facilities in rural counties. The public facility must be listed as an item in
the officially adopted county overall economic development plan, or the
economic development section of the county's comprehensive plan, or the
comprehensive plan of a city or town located within the county for those
counties planning under RCW 36.70A.040. For those counties that do not have an
adopted overall economic development plan and do not plan under the growth
management act, the public facility must be listed in the county's capital
facilities plan or the capital facilities plan of a city or town located within
the county. In implementing this section, the county shall consult with
cities, towns, and port districts located within the county. For the purposes
of this section, "public facilities" means a project of a rural
county for the planning, acquisition, construction, repair, reconstruction,
replacement, rehabilitation, or improvement of bridges, roads, domestic and
industrial water facilities, sanitary sewer facilities, earth stabilization,
storm sewer facilities, railroad, electricity, natural gas, buildings,
structures, telecommunications infrastructure, transportation infrastructure,
or commercial infrastructure, and port facilities, all for the purpose of
private sector job creation or retention in the state of Washington.

(4) No tax may be
collected under this section before July 1, 1998. No tax may be collected
under this section by a county more than twenty-five years after the date that
a tax is first imposed under this section.

(5) For
purposes of this section, "rural county" means a county with a
population density of less than one hundred persons per square mile or a
county smaller than two hundred twenty-five square miles as determined by
the office of financial management and published each year by the department
for the period July 1st to June 30th.

--- END ---