BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF
WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec.
1. The legislature finds
that in order to comply with the community mental health services act, chapter
71.24 RCW, and the medicaid managed care mental health waiver, and to
effectively assist persons with mental illness and consumers of mental health
services in the assertion of their civil and human rights, and to improve the
quality of services available and promote the rehabilitation, recovery, and
reintegration of these persons, an independent mental health ombudsman program
should be instituted.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
2. As used in this chapter,
"mental health provider or facility" means any of the following:

(1) An agency,
individual, or facility that is part of the community mental health service
delivery system, as defined in RCW 71.24.025;

(2) A long-term care
facility, as defined in RCW 43.190.020, in which adults or children with mental
illness reside;

(3) A state hospital,
as defined in RCW 72.23.010; and

(4) A facility or
agency that receives funds from the state of Washington to provide residential
or treatment services to adults or children with mental illness.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
3. (1) The department of
community, trade, and economic development shall contract with a private
nonprofit organization to be the office of mental health ombudsman and to
provide mental health ombudsman services as specified under, and consistent
with, the medicaid managed care mental health waiver, state law, the goals of
the state, and the needs of its citizens. The department of community, trade,
and economic development shall ensure that all program and staff support
necessary to enable the ombudsman to effectively protect the interests of
persons with mental illness is provided by the nonprofit organization that
contracts to be the office of mental health ombudsman and to provide
independent mental health ombudsman services. The department shall designate
the organization to be the office of mental health ombudsman and to provide
mental health ombudsman services by a competitive bidding process which shall
include direct stakeholder participation in the development of the request for
proposal, evaluation of bids, and final selection. The department shall ensure
that the designated agency has demonstrated financial stability and meets the
qualifications for ombudsman identified in section 4 of this act. The
department shall undertake an annual review of the designated agency to ensure
compliance with the provisions of the contract. The department shall not
redesignate the agency serving as the office of mental health ombudsman except
upon a showing of good cause for redesignation, and after notice and
opportunity for agency and public comment have been made and there has been an
opportunity to appeal the redesignation to the director.

(2) The department of
community, trade, and economic development shall adopt rules to carry out this
chapter.

(3) The office of
mental health ombudsman shall have the following powers and duties:

(a) Provide services
for coordinating the activities of mental health ombudsmen throughout the
state;

(b) Carry out such
other activities as the department of community, trade, and economic
development deems appropriate;

(c) Establish
procedures consistent with section 11 of this act for appropriate access by
mental health ombudsmen to mental health providers and facilities and the
records of patients, residents, and clients, including procedures to protect
the confidentiality of the records and ensure that the identity of any
complainant or resident will not be disclosed without the written consent of
the complainant or resident, or upon court order;

(d) Establish a
statewide uniform reporting system to collect and analyze data relating to
complaints, conditions, and service quality provided by mental health providers
and facilities for the purpose of identifying and resolving significant
individual problems and analyzing, developing, and advocating remedies in
policy, practice, or legislation for systemic problems, with provision for
submission of such data to the department of social and health services, the
state block grant mental health advisory committee, and to the federal
department of health and human services, or its successor agency, on a regular
basis. This reporting system must be compatible with uniform child and adult
consumer service outcomes, where such outcome measures are established;

(e) Establish
procedures to assure that any files maintained by ombudsman programs shall be
disclosed only at the discretion of the ombudsman having authority over the
disposition of such files, except that the identity of a complainant or
patient, resident, or client of a mental health provider or facility may not be
disclosed by the ombudsman unless:

(i) The complainant or
resident, or the complainant or resident's legal representative, consents in
writing to such disclosure; or

(ii) Such disclosure is
required by court order; and

(f) Establish ombudsman
services that are available statewide, and at eastern state and western state
hospitals.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
4. (1) The agency designated
by the department of community, trade, and economic development as the office
of mental health ombudsman and any mental health ombudsman authorized by this
chapter or a local governmental authority must have training or experience in
all of the following areas:

(a) Mental health and
other related social services programs;

(b) The legal system;

(c) Advocacy and supporting
self-advocacy; and

(d) Dispute or problem
resolution techniques, including investigation, mediation, and negotiation.

(2) A mental health
ombudsman or quality review team member must not have been employed by a
regional support network or any mental health provider or facility within the
past three years, except where prior to the adoption of this chapter he or she
has been employed by or volunteered for a regional support network or
subcontractor thereof or a state hospital to provide mental health ombudsman
services pursuant to the requirements of the federal medicaid managed care
mental health waiver. The office of mental health ombudsman shall actively
recruit persons who provided ombudsman services through a regional support
network or subcontractor thereof or a state hospital.

(3) No mental health
ombudsman or any member of his or her immediate family may have, or have had
within the past three years, any pecuniary interest in the provision of mental
health services.

(4) The office of mental
health ombudsman shall maintain a toll-free telephone number.

(5) Mental health
ombudsmen shall assist and advocate on behalf of patients, residents, and
clients of mental health providers and facilities and shall attempt to resolve
complaints informally, using complaint and grievance processes and, if
applicable, the fair hearing process. Mental health ombudsmen shall attempt to
resolve all disputes at the lowest possible level.

(6) The office of
mental health ombudsman shall ensure that there are quality review teams
established to evaluate quality and consumer satisfaction and provide
recommendations for service improvements, as required by the medicaid managed
care waiver. Quality review teams shall define, establish, and measure
systemic consumer outcomes and report on systemic causes of consumer access
barrier service problems.

(7) Where consented to
by the patient, resident, or client, ombudsmen shall involve family members and
friends in the process of resolving complaints.

(8) The office of
mental health ombudsman shall support mental health service recipient
participation in treatment planning and delivery, both on an individual basis
and systemwide, and shall actively recruit and support the participation of
consumers, parents, and guardians of minor children recipients, and family
members of adult service recipients as mental health ombudsmen and quality
review team members.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
5. (1) The office of mental
health ombudsman shall provide information relevant to the quality of mental
health services, and recommendations for improvements in the quality of mental
health services, to regional support networks and the mental health division.

(2) The mental health
division and the regional support networks shall work in cooperation with the
office of mental health ombudsman to develop agreements regarding how this
quality information will be incorporated into their quality management system.
These agreements must ensure that information related to complaints and
grievances conforms to a standardized form.

(3) The office of
mental health ombudsman shall ensure that its reports and recommendations are
broadly distributed and shall report annually regarding its activities,
findings, and recommendations to at least the following: The mental health
division, the mental health advisory board, the state long-term care ombudsman,
the state family and children's ombudsman, the state designated protection and
advocacy system, the department of community, trade, and economic development,
regional support networks, and mental health advocacy groups.

(4) Regional support
networks and the mental health division shall promptly provide the office of
mental health ombudsman with demographic information they possess regarding the
diversity of individuals applying for, receiving, and denied services in each
region, service utilization information, contract and subcontract requirements,
the results of all audits and reviews conducted by the regional support
networks or the mental health division, and such other information collected or
produced by the regional support networks or the mental health division as may
be necessary for mental health ombudsman and quality review team members in the
performance of their duties.

(5) Regional support
networks and the mental health division shall assist mental health ombudsman
and quality review team members in obtaining entry and meaningful access to
mental health providers and facilities, cooperation from their staff, and
access to patients and clients.

(6) Each regional
support network and state hospital shall designate at least one liaison to the
office of mental health ombudsman who shall be responsible for ensuring that
mental health ombudsman and quality review team members are actively included
in quality management planning and assessment, for providing assistance in
resolving issues regarding access to information and patients or clients, and
for resolving individual and systemic issues where requested by the mental
health ombudsman or quality review team.

(7) Regional support
networks, state hospitals, and their subcontractors shall respond in writing to
all recommendations regarding quality improvement made by mental health
ombudsmen and quality review teams within thirty days of issuance, and shall
identify what action will be taken in response, and if no action or action
other than that which is recommended by the mental health ombudsman or quality
review team is taken, the reasons for the variance must be explained in
writing.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
6. The office of mental
health ombudsman shall provide the legislature with an annual report that
includes:

(1) An identification
of the demographic status of those served by the mental health ombudsman;

(2) A description of
the issues addressed, and a brief description of case scenarios in a form that
does not compromise confidentiality;

(3) An accounting of
the monitoring activities of the ombudsman;

(4) An identification
of the results of measurements of consumer satisfaction and other outcome
measures;

(5) An identification
of the numbers of volunteers used and in what capacity;

(6) An identification
of deficiencies in the service system and recommendations for remedial action;

(7) Recommendations for
regulatory action by agencies that would improve the quality of service to
individuals with mental illness; and

(8) Recommendations for
legislative action that would result in improved services to individuals with
mental illness.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
7. Every mental health
provider and facility shall post in a conspicuous location a notice providing
the office of mental health ombudsman's toll‑free number, and the name,
address, and phone number of the office of the appropriate local mental health
ombudsman and quality review team and a brief description of the services
provided. The form of the notice must be approved by the office of mental
health ombudsman. This information must also be distributed to the patients,
residents, and clients, and their family members and legal guardians, upon
application for mental health provider services, and upon admission to a mental
health facility.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
8. The office of mental
health ombudsman shall:

(1) Identify,
investigate, and resolve complaints made by or on behalf of patients,
residents, clients of mental health providers and facilities, and individuals
denied services relating to administrative action, inaction, or decisions, that
may adversely affect the rehabilitation, recovery, reintegration, health,
safety, welfare, and rights of these individuals;

(2) Monitor the
development and implementation of federal, state, and local laws, rules,
regulations, and policies with respect to mental health service provision in
this state;

(3) Provide information
as appropriate to patients, residents, clients, individuals denied services,
family members, guardians, resident representatives, employees of mental health
providers and facilities, and others regarding the rights of residents, and to
public agencies regarding the quality of service, complaints, and problems of
individuals receiving or denied services from mental health providers and
facilities; and

(4) Provide for the
training of volunteers invited to assist the ombudsman program and the
promotion of the development of citizen organizations to participate in the
ombudsman program. Volunteers and citizen organizations may not be used
instead of employed ombudsmen to perform the fundamental functions of the
program.

(5) A trained and
certified mental health ombudsman, in accordance with the policies and
procedures established by the office of mental health ombudsman, shall inform
residents, their representatives, and others about the rights of residents, and
may identify, investigate, and resolve complaints and monitor the quality of
services provided to patients, residents, and clients of mental health
providers and facilities.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
9. (1) The office of mental
health ombudsman shall develop referral procedures for all mental health
ombudsmen to refer any complaint to an appropriate state or local government
agency. The department of social and health services shall act as quickly as
possible on any complaint referred to them by a mental health ombudsman.

(2) The department of
social and health services shall respond to any complaint against a mental
health provider or facility that was referred to it by a mental health
ombudsman and shall forward to that ombudsman a summary of the results of the
investigation and action proposed or taken.

(3) The office of
mental health ombudsman, and all local mental health ombudsmen and related
volunteers, shall work in cooperation with the state designated protection and
advocacy agency, the long-term care ombudsman, and the children and family
ombudsman. The office of mental health ombudsman shall develop and implement a
working agreement with the protection and advocacy agency, the long-term care
ombudsman, and the children and family ombudsman, to ensure efficient,
coordinated service.

(4) The office of
mental health ombudsman shall develop working agreements with each regional
support network, the state psychiatric hospitals, the mental health division,
and such other entities as necessary to accomplish the goals of the program.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
10. (1) The office of mental
health ombudsman shall develop procedures governing the right of entry of all
mental health ombudsmen to mental health providers and facilities, jails, and
correctional facilities.

(2) Mental health
ombudsmen and quality review team members shall have access to patients,
residents, and clients of mental health providers and facilities, other
entities providing inpatient or outpatient social services, and jails, with
provisions made for privacy, for the purpose of hearing, investigating, and
resolving complaints and monitoring the quality of services, at any time deemed
necessary and reasonable by the office of mental health ombudsman to
effectively carry out the provisions of this chapter. Ombudsmen and quality
review team members who have passed criminal background checks must have access
to inmates at correctional facilities with reasonable notice to the department
of corrections, with provisions made for privacy, for the purpose of hearing,
investigating, and resolving complaints and monitoring the quality of services,
at any time deemed necessary and reasonable by the office of mental health
ombudsman to effectively carry out the provisions of this chapter.

(3) Nothing in this
chapter restricts, limits, or increases any existing right of an organization
or individual not described in subsections (1) and (2) of this section to enter
or provide assistance to patients, residents, or clients of mental health
providers or facilities.

(4) Nothing in this
chapter restricts any right or privilege of a patient, resident, or client of a
mental health provider or facility to receive visitors of his or her choice.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
11. (1) No mental health
ombudsman, volunteer, or quality review team member is liable for good faith
performance of responsibilities under this chapter.

(2) No discriminatory,
disciplinary, or retaliatory action may be taken against an employee of a
mental health provider or facility, or a patient, resident, or client of a
mental health provider or facility, or a volunteer, for any communication made,
or information given or disclosed, to aid the mental health ombudsman or
quality review team in carrying out duties and responsibilities under this
chapter, unless the same was done maliciously or without good faith. This
subsection is not intended to infringe on the rights of the employer to
supervise, discipline, or terminate an employee for other reasons.

(3) All communications
by a mental health ombudsman or quality review team member, if reasonably
related to the requirements of that individual's responsibilities under this
chapter and done in good faith, are privileged, and that privilege shall serve
as a defense to any action in libel or slander.

(4) A representative of
the office of mental health ombudsman is exempt from being required to testify
in court as to any confidential matters except as the court may deem necessary
to enforce this chapter.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
12. All records and files of
mental health ombudsmen relating to any complaint or investigation made pursuant
to carrying out their duties and the identities of complainants, witnesses,
patients, or residents shall remain confidential unless disclosure is
authorized by the client or his or her guardian or legal representative. No
disclosures may be made outside the office without the consent of any named
witnesses, resident, patient, client, or complainant unless the disclosure is
made without the identity of any of these individuals being disclosed.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
13. (1) It is the intent of
the legislature that the state mental health ombudsman program make reasonable
efforts to maintain and improve the current level and quality of care, taking
into account the transition period from the current system of ombudsman
programs and quality review teams within the regional support networks and
state hospitals.

(2) It is the intent of
the legislature that federal medicaid requirements be complied with and the
department of community, trade, and economic development expend no more than
the amount currently expended on mental health ombudsman services and quality
review team services by regional support networks and state hospitals and their
subcontractors, including related administrative costs, pursuant to contracts
with the department of social and health services, to establish the mental
health ombudsman program established by this chapter, and the amount annually
expended by the mental health division in staff support, monitoring, oversight,
and subcontracted training and consultation for community mental health
ombudsman and quality review team services and state hospital mental health
patient advocate or ombudsman services, except to the extent that additional
funds are appropriated by the legislature, for the first two years after the
enactment of this act.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
14. If any provision of this
act or its application to any person or circumstance is held invalid, the
remainder of the act or the application of the provision to other persons or
circumstances is not affected.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
15. This act takes effect
July 1, 2002.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 16. Sections 1 through 15 of
this act constitute a new chapter in Title 71 RCW.

---
END ---