BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF
WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec.
1. A new section is added
to chapter 9.38 RCW to read as follows:

(1) A person shall not
knowingly misrepresent the person's identity or authorization to obtain a
public key certificate used to reference a private key for creating a digital
signature.

(2) A person shall not
knowingly forge a digital signature as defined in RCW 19.34.020(16).

(3) A person shall not
knowingly present a public key certificate for which the person is not the
owner of the corresponding private key in order to obtain unauthorized access
to information or engage in an unauthorized transaction.

(4) The definitions in
RCW 19.34.020 apply to this section.

(5) A
person who violates this section is guilty of a class C felony punishable under
chapter 9A.20 RCW.

--- END ---