BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF
WASHINGTON:

_7 Sec. 1. RCW
48.20.025 and 2000 c 79 s 3 are each amended to read

_8 as follows:

_9 (1) The definitions in this subsection apply
throughout this

10 section unless the context clearly requires otherwise.

11 (a) "Claims" means the cost to the insurer
of health care

12 services, as defined in RCW 48.43.005, provided to a
policyholder

13 or paid to or on behalf of the policyholder in
accordance with the

14 terms of a health benefit plan, as defined in RCW
48.43.005. This

15 includes capitation payments or other similar payments
made to

16 providers for the purpose of paying for health care
services for a

17 policyholder.

p. 1 SHB
1633

_1 (b) "Claims reserves" means: (i) The
liability for claims which

_2 have been reported but not paid; (ii) the liability for
claims

_3 which have not been reported but which may reasonably be
expected;

_4 (iii) active life reserves; and (iv) additional claims
reserves

_5 whether for a specific liability purpose or not.

_6 (c) "Earned premiums" means premiums, as
defined in RCW

_7 48.43.005, plus any rate credits or recoupments less any
refunds,

_8 for the applicable period, whether received before,
during, or

_9 after the applicable period.

10 (d) "Incurred claims expense" means claims
paid during the

11 applicable period plus any increase, or less any
decrease, in the

12 claims reserves.

13 (e) "Loss ratio" means incurred claims
expense as a percentage

14 of earned premiums.

15 (f) "Reserves" means: (i) Active life
reserves; and (ii)

16 additional reserves whether for a specific liability
purpose or

17 not.

18 (2) An insurer shall file, for informational
purposes only, a

19 notice of its schedule of rates for its individual
health benefit

20 plans with the commissioner prior to use.

21 (3) An insurer shall file with the notice required
under

22 subsection (2) of this section supporting documentation
of its

23 method of determining the rates charged. The commissioner
may

24 request only the following supporting documentation:

25 (a) A description of the insurer's rate-making
methodology;

26 (b) An actuarially determined estimate of incurred
claims which

27 includes the experience data, assumptions, and justifications
of

28 the insurer's projection;

29 (c) The percentage of premium attributable in
aggregate for

30 nonclaims expenses used to determine the adjusted
community rates

31 charged; and

32 (d) A certification by a member of the American
academy of

33 actuaries, or other person approved by the commissioner,
that the

34 adjusted community rate charged can be reasonably
expected to

35 result in a loss ratio that meets or exceeds the loss
ratio

36 standard established in subsection (7) of this section.

37 (4) The commissioner may not disapprove or otherwise
impede the

38 implementation of the filed rates.

SHB 1633 p. 2

_1 (5) By the last day of May each year any insurer ((providing))

_2 issuing or renewing individual health benefit plans
in this state

_3 during the preceding calendar year shall file for
review by the

_4 commissioner supporting documentation of its actual loss
ratio for

_5 its individual health benefit plans offered or
renewed in the

_6 state in aggregate for the preceding calendar year. The
filing

_7 shall include aggregate earned premiums, aggregate
incurred

_8 claims, and a certification by a member of the
American academy of

_9 actuaries, or other person approved by the commissioner,
that the

10 actual loss ratio has been calculated in accordance with
accepted

11 actuarial principles.

12 (a) At the expiration of a thirty-day period
beginning with the

13 date the filing is ((delivered to)) received
by the commissioner,

14 the filing shall be deemed approved unless prior thereto
the

15 commissioner contests the calculation of the actual loss
ratio.

16 (b) If the commissioner contests the calculation of
the actual

17 loss ratio, the commissioner shall state in writing the
grounds

18 for contesting the calculation to the insurer.

19 (c) Any dispute regarding the calculation of the
actual loss

20 ratio shall, upon written demand of either the
commissioner or the

21 insurer, be submitted to hearing under chapters 48.04
and 34.05

22 RCW.

23 (6) If the actual loss ratio for the preceding
calendar year is

24 less than the loss ratio established in subsection (7)
of this

25 section, a remittance is due and the following shall
apply:

26 (a) The insurer shall calculate a percentage of
premium to be

27 remitted to the Washington state health insurance pool
by

28 subtracting the actual loss ratio for the preceding year
from the

29 loss ratio established in subsection (7) of this
section.

30 (b) The remittance to the Washington state health
insurance

31 pool is the percentage calculated in (a) of ((the
[this])) this

32 subsection, multiplied by the premium earned from each
enrollee in

33 the previous calendar year. Interest shall be added to
the

34 remittance due at a five percent annual rate calculated
from the

35 end of the calendar year for which the remittance is due
to the

36 date the remittance is made.

37 (c) All remittances shall be aggregated and such
amounts shall

p. 3 SHB
1633

_1 be remitted to the Washington state high risk pool to be
used as

_2 directed by the pool board of directors.

_3 (d) Any remittance required to be issued under this
section

_4 shall be issued within thirty days after the actual loss
ratio is

_5 deemed approved under subsection (5)(a) of this section
or the

_6 determination by an administrative law judge under
subsection

_7 (5)(c) of this section.

_8 (7) The loss ratio applicable to this section shall
be seventy-

_9 four percent minus the premium tax rate applicable to
the

10 insurer's individual health benefit plans under RCW
48.14.0201.

11 Sec. 2. RCW
48.41.030 and 2000 c 79 s 6 are each amended to read

12 as follows:

13 The definitions in this section apply throughout
this chapter

14 unless the context clearly requires otherwise.

15 (1) "Accounting year" means a twelve-month
period determined by

16 the board for purposes of record-keeping and
accounting. The first

17 accounting year may be more or less than twelve months
and, from

18 time to time in subsequent years, the board may order an

19 accounting year of other than twelve months as may be
required for

20 orderly management and accounting of the pool.

21 (2) "Administrator" means the entity
chosen by the board to

22 administer the pool under RCW 48.41.080.

23 (3) "Board" means the board of directors
of the pool.

24 (4) "Commissioner" means the insurance
commissioner.

25 (5) "Covered person" means any individual
resident of this

26 state who is eligible to receive benefits from any
member, or

27 other health plan.

28 (6) "Health care facility" has the same
meaning as in RCW

29 70.38.025.

30 (7) "Health care provider" means any
physician, facility, or

31 health care professional, who is licensed in Washington
state and

32 entitled to reimbursement for health care services.

33 (8) "Health care services" means services
for the purpose of

34 preventing, alleviating, curing, or healing human
illness or

35 injury.

36 (9) "Health carrier" or
"carrier" has the same meaning as in

37 RCW 48.43.005.

SHB 1633 p. 4

_1 (10) "Health coverage" means any group or
individual disability

_2 insurance policy, health care service contract, and
health

_3 maintenance agreement, except those contracts entered
into for the

_4 provision of health care services pursuant to Title
XVIII of the

_5 Social Security Act, 42 U.S.C. Sec. 1395 et seq. The
term does not

_6 include short-term care, long-term care, dental, vision,
accident,

_7 fixed indemnity, disability income contracts, ((civilian
health

_8 and medical program for the uniform services
(CHAMPUS), 10 U.S.C.

_9 55,)) limited benefit or credit insurance,
coverage issued as a

10 supplement to liability insurance, insurance arising out
of the

11 worker's compensation or similar law, automobile medical
payment

12 insurance, or insurance under which benefits are payable
with or

13 without regard to fault and which is statutorily
required to be

14 contained in any liability insurance policy or
equivalent self-

15 insurance.

16 (11) "Health plan" means any arrangement
by which persons,

17 including dependents or spouses, covered or making
application to

18 be covered under this pool, have access to hospital and
medical

19 benefits or reimbursement including any group or
individual

20 disability insurance policy; health care service
contract; health

21 maintenance agreement; uninsured arrangements of group
or group-

22 type contracts including employer self-insured,
cost-plus, or

23 other benefit methodologies not involving insurance or
not

24 governed by Title 48 RCW; coverage under group-type
contracts

25 which are not available to the general public and can be
obtained

26 only because of connection with a particular
organization or

27 group; and coverage by medicare or other governmental
benefits.

28 This term includes coverage through "health
coverage" as defined

29 under this section, and specifically excludes those
types of

30 programs excluded under the definition of "health
coverage" in

31 subsection (10) of this section.

32 (12) "Medical assistance" means coverage
under Title XIX of the

33 federal Social Security Act (42 U.S.C., Sec. 1396 et
seq.) and

34 chapter 74.09 RCW.

35 (13) "Medicare" means coverage under Title
XVIII of the Social

36 Security Act, (42 U.S.C. Sec. 1395 et seq., as amended).

37 (14) "Member" means any commercial insurer
which provides

38 disability insurance or stop loss insurance, any health
care

p. 5 SHB
1633

_1 service contractor, and any health maintenance
organization

_2 licensed under Title 48 RCW. "Member" also
means the Washington

_3 state health care authority as issuer of the state
uniform medical

_4 plan. "Member" shall also mean, as soon as
authorized by federal

_5 law, employers and other entities, including a
self-funding entity

_6 and employee welfare benefit plans that provide health
plan

_7 benefits in this state on or after May 18, 1987.
"Member" does not

_8 include any insurer, health care service contractor, or
health

_9 maintenance organization whose products are exclusively
dental

10 products or those products excluded from the definition
of "health

11 coverage" set forth in subsection (10) of this
section.

12 (15) "Network provider" means a health
care provider who has

13 contracted in writing with the pool administrator or a
health

14 carrier contracting with the pool administrator to offer
pool

15 coverage to accept payment from and to look solely to
the pool or

16 health carrier according to the terms of the pool health
plans.

17 (16) "Plan of operation" means the pool,
including articles, by-

18 laws, and operating rules, adopted by the board pursuant
to RCW

19 48.41.050.

20 (17) "Point of service plan" means a
benefit plan offered by

21 the pool under which a covered person may elect to
receive covered

22 services from network providers, or nonnetwork providers
at a

23 reduced rate of benefits.

24 (18) "Pool" means the Washington state
health insurance pool as

25 created in RCW 48.41.040.

26 Sec. 3. RCW
48.41.040 and 2000 c 80 s 1 are each amended to read

27 as follows:

28 (1) There is created a nonprofit entity to be known
as the

29 Washington state health insurance pool. All members in
this state

30 on or after May 18, 1987, shall be members of the pool.
When

31 authorized by federal law, all self-insured employers
shall also

32 be members of the pool.

33 (2) Pursuant to chapter 34.05 RCW the commissioner
shall,

34 within ninety days after May 18, 1987, give notice to
all members

35 of the time and place for the initial organizational
meetings of

36 the pool. A board of directors shall be established,
which shall

37 be comprised of ten members. The governor shall select
one member

SHB 1633 p. 6

_1 of the board from each list of three nominees submitted
by

_2 statewide organizations representing each of the
following: (a)

_3 Health care providers; (b) health insurance agents; (c)
small

_4 employers; and (d) large employers. The governor shall
select two

_5 members of the board from a list of nominees submitted
by

_6 statewide organizations representing health care
consumers. In

_7 making these selections, the governor may request
additional names

_8 from the statewide organizations representing each of
the persons

_9 to be selected if the governor chooses not to select a
member from

10 the list submitted. The remaining four members of the
board shall

11 be selected by election from among the members of the
pool. The

12 elected members shall, to the extent possible, include
at least

13 one representative of health care service contractors,
one

14 representative of health maintenance organizations, and
one

15 representative of commercial insurers which provides
disability

16 insurance. The members of the board shall elect a chair
from the

17 voting members of the board. The insurance commissioner
shall be

18 a nonvoting, ex officio member. When self-insured
organizations

19 other than the Washington state health care authority
become

20 eligible for participation in the pool, the membership
of the

21 board shall be increased to eleven and at least one
member of the

22 board shall represent the self-insurers.

23 (3) The original members of the board of directors
shall be

24 appointed for intervals of one to three years.
Thereafter, all

25 board members shall serve a term of three years. Board
members

26 shall receive no compensation, but shall be reimbursed
for all

27 travel expenses as provided in RCW 43.03.050 and
43.03.060.

28 (4) The board shall submit to the commissioner a
plan of

29 operation for the pool and any amendments thereto
necessary or

30 suitable to assure the fair, reasonable, and equitable

31 administration of the pool. The commissioner shall,
after notice

32 and hearing pursuant to chapter 34.05 RCW, approve the
plan of

33 operation if it is determined to assure the fair,
reasonable, and

34 equitable administration of the pool and provides for
the sharing

35 of pool losses on an equitable, proportionate basis
among the

36 members of the pool. The plan of operation shall become
effective

37 upon approval in writing by the commissioner consistent
with the

38 date on which the coverage under this chapter must be
made

p. 7 SHB
1633

_1 available. If the board fails to submit a plan of
operation

_2 within one hundred eighty days after the appointment of
the board

_3 or any time thereafter fails to submit acceptable
amendments to

_4 the plan, the commissioner shall, within ninety days
after notice

_5 and hearing pursuant to chapters 34.05 and 48.04 RCW,
adopt such

_6 rules as are necessary or advisable to effectuate this
chapter.

_7 The rules shall continue in force until modified by the

_8 commissioner or superseded by a plan submitted by the
board and

_9 approved by the commissioner.

10 (5) The board is subject to the provisions of the
open public

11 meetings act, chapter 42.30 RCW.

12 Sec. 4. RCW
48.41.100 and 2000 c 79 s 12 are each amended to read

13 as follows:

14 (1) The following persons who are residents of this
state are

15 eligible for pool coverage:

16 (a) Any person who provides evidence of a carrier's
decision

17 not to accept him or her for enrollment in an individual
health

18 benefit plan as defined in RCW 48.43.005 based upon, and
within

19 ninety days of the receipt of, the results of the
standard health

20 questionnaire designated by the board and administered
by health

21 carriers under RCW 48.43.018;

22 (b) Any person who continues to be eligible for pool
coverage

23 based upon the results of the standard health
questionnaire

24 designated by the board and administered by the pool
administrator

25 pursuant to subsection (3) of this section;

26 (c) Any person who resides in a county of the state
where no

27 carrier or insurer ((regulated)) eligible
under chapter 48.15 RCW

28 offers to the public an individual health benefit plan
other than

29 a catastrophic health plan as defined in RCW 48.43.005
at the time

30 of application to the pool, and who makes direct
application to

31 the pool; and

32 (d) Any medicare eligible person upon providing
evidence of

33 rejection for medical reasons, a requirement of
restrictive

34 riders, an up-rated premium, or a preexisting conditions

35 limitation on a medicare supplemental insurance policy
under

36 chapter 48.66 RCW, the effect of which is to
substantially reduce

SHB 1633 p. 8

_1 coverage from that received by a person considered a
standard risk

_2 by at least one member within six months of the date of

_3 application.

_4 (2) The following persons are not eligible for
coverage by the

_5 pool:

_6 (a) Any person having terminated coverage in the
pool unless

_7 (i) twelve months have lapsed since termination, or (ii)
that

_8 person can show continuous other coverage which has been

_9 involuntarily terminated for any reason other than
nonpayment of

10 premiums. However, these exclusions do not apply to
eligible

11 individuals as defined in section 2741(b) of the
federal health

12 insurance portability and accountability act of 1996
(42 U.S.C.

13 Sec. 300gg-41(b));

14 (b) Any person on whose behalf the pool has paid out
one

15 million dollars in benefits;

16 (c) Inmates of public institutions and persons whose
benefits

17 are duplicated under public programs. However, these
exclusions do

18 not apply to eligible individuals as defined in
section 2741(b) of

19 the federal health insurance portability and
accountability act of

20 1996 (42 U.S.C. Sec. 300gg-41(b));

21 (d) Any person who resides in a county of the state
where any

22 carrier or insurer regulated under chapter 48.15 RCW
offers to the

23 public an individual health benefit plan other than a
catastrophic

24 health plan as defined in RCW 48.43.005 at the time of
application

25 to the pool and who does not qualify for pool coverage
based upon

26 the results of the standard health questionnaire, or
pursuant to

27 subsection (1)(d) of this section.

28 (3) When a carrier or insurer regulated under
chapter 48.15 RCW

29 begins to offer an individual health benefit plan in a
county

30 where no carrier had been offering an individual health
benefit

31 plan:

32 (a) If the health benefit plan offered is other than
a

33 catastrophic health plan as defined in RCW 48.43.005,
any person

34 enrolled in a pool plan pursuant to subsection (1)(c) of
this

35 section in that county shall no longer be eligible for
coverage

36 under that plan pursuant to subsection (1)(c) of this
section, but

37 may continue to be eligible for pool coverage based upon
the

38 results of the standard health questionnaire designated
by the

p. 9 SHB
1633

_1 board and administered by the pool administrator. The
pool

_2 administrator shall offer to administer the
questionnaire to each

_3 person no longer eligible for coverage under subsection
(1)(c) of

_4 this section within thirty days of determining that he
or she is

_5 no longer eligible;

_6 (b) Losing eligibility for pool coverage under this
subsection

_7 (3) does not affect a person's eligibility for pool
coverage under

_8 subsection (1)(a), (b), or (d) of this section; and

_9 (c) The pool administrator shall provide written
notice to any

10 person who is no longer eligible for coverage under a
pool plan

11 under this subsection (3) within thirty days of the

12 administrator's determination that the person is no
longer

13 eligible. The notice shall: (i) Indicate that coverage
under the

14 plan will cease ninety days from the date that the
notice is

15 dated; (ii) describe any other coverage options, either
in or

16 outside of the pool, available to the person; (iii)
describe the

17 procedures for the administration of the standard health

18 questionnaire to determine the person's continued
eligibility for

19 coverage under subsection (1)(b) of this section; and
(iv)

20 describe the enrollment process for the available
options outside

21 of the pool.

22 Sec. 5. RCW
48.41.110 and 2000 c 80 s 2 are each amended to read

23 as follows:

24 (1) The pool shall offer one or more care management
plans of

25 coverage. Such plans may, but are not required to,
include point of

26 service features that permit participants to receive
in-network

27 benefits or out-of-network benefits subject to
differential cost

28 shares. Covered persons enrolled in the pool on January
1, 2001,

29 may continue coverage under the pool plan in which they
are

30 enrolled on that date. However, the pool may
incorporate managed

31 care features into such existing plans.

32 (2) The administrator shall prepare a brochure outlining
the

33 benefits and exclusions of the pool policy in plain
language.

34 After approval by the board, such brochure shall be made

35 reasonably available to participants or potential
participants.

36 (3) The health insurance policy issued by the pool
shall pay

37 only reasonable amounts for medically necessary eligible
health

SHB 1633 p. 10

_1 care services rendered or furnished for the diagnosis or
treatment

_2 of illnesses, injuries, and conditions which are not
otherwise

_3 limited or excluded. Eligible expenses are the
reasonable amounts

_4 for the health care services and items for which
benefits are

_5 extended under the pool policy. Such benefits shall at
minimum

_6 include, but not be limited to, the following services
or related

_7 items:

_8 (a) Hospital services, including charges for the
most common

_9 semiprivate room, for the most common private room if
semiprivate

10 rooms do not exist in the health care facility, or for
the private

11 room if medically necessary, but limited to a total of
one hundred

12 eighty inpatient days in a calendar year, and limited to
thirty

13 days inpatient care for mental and nervous conditions,
or alcohol,

14 drug, or chemical dependency or abuse per calendar year;

15 (b) Professional services including surgery for the
treatment

16 of injuries, illnesses, or conditions, other than
dental, which

17 are rendered by a health care provider, or at the
direction of a

18 health care provider, by a staff of registered or
licensed

19 practical nurses, or other health care providers;

20 (c) The first twenty outpatient professional visits
for the

21 diagnosis or treatment of one or more mental or nervous
conditions

22 or alcohol, drug, or chemical dependency or abuse
rendered during

23 a calendar year by one or more physicians,
psychologists, or

24 community mental health professionals, or, at the
direction of a

25 physician, by other qualified licensed health care
practitioners,

26 in the case of mental or nervous conditions, and
rendered by a

27 state certified chemical dependency program approved
under chapter

28 70.96A RCW, in the case of alcohol, drug, or chemical
dependency

29 or abuse;

30 (d) Drugs and contraceptive devices requiring a
prescription;

31 (e) Services of a skilled nursing facility,
excluding custodial

32 and convalescent care, for not more than one hundred
days in a

33 calendar year as prescribed by a physician;

34 (f) Services of a home health agency;

35 (g) Chemotherapy, radioisotope, radiation, and
nuclear medicine

36 therapy;

37 (h) Oxygen;

38 (i) Anesthesia services;

p. 11 SHB
1633

_1 (j) Prostheses, other than dental;

_2 (k) Durable medical equipment which has no personal
use in the

_3 absence of the condition for which prescribed;

_4 (l) Diagnostic x-rays and laboratory tests;

_5 (m) Oral surgery limited to the following:
Fractures of facial

_6 bones; excisions of mandibular joints, lesions of the
mouth, lip,

_7 or tongue, tumors, or cysts excluding treatment for

_8 temporomandibular joints; incision of accessory sinuses,
mouth

_9 salivary glands or ducts; dislocations of the jaw;
plastic

10 reconstruction or repair of traumatic injuries occurring
while

11 covered under the pool; and excision of impacted wisdom
teeth;

12 (n) Maternity care services;

13 (o) Services of a physical therapist and services of
a speech

14 therapist;

15 (p) Hospice services;

16 (q) Professional ambulance service to the nearest
health care

17 facility qualified to treat the illness or injury; and

18 (r) Other medical equipment, services, or supplies
required by

19 physician's orders and medically necessary and
consistent with the

20 diagnosis, treatment, and condition.

21 (4) The board shall design and employ cost
containment measures

22 and requirements such as, but not limited to, care
coordination,

23 provider network limitations, preadmission
certification, and

24 concurrent inpatient review which may make the pool more
cost-

25 effective.

26 (5) The pool benefit policy may contain benefit
limitations,

27 exceptions, and cost shares such as copayments,
coinsurance, and

28 deductibles that are consistent with managed care
products, except

29 that differential cost shares may be adopted by the
board for

30 nonnetwork providers under point of service plans. The
pool benefit

31 policy cost shares and limitations must be consistent
with those

32 that are generally included in health plans approved by
the

33 insurance commissioner; however, no limitation,
exception, or

34 reduction may be used that would exclude coverage for
any disease,

35 illness, or injury.

36 (6) The pool may not reject an individual for health
plan

37 coverage based upon preexisting conditions of the
individual or

38 deny, exclude, or otherwise limit coverage for an
individual's

SHB 1633 p. 12

_1 preexisting health conditions; except that it shall
impose a six-

_2 month benefit waiting period for preexisting conditions
for which

_3 medical advice was given, for which a health care
provider

_4 recommended or provided treatment, or for which a
prudent

_5 layperson would have sought advice or treatment, within
six months

_6 before the effective date of coverage. The preexisting
condition

_7 waiting period shall not apply to prenatal care
services. The pool

_8 may not avoid the requirements of this section through
the

_9 creation of a new rate classification or the
modification of an

10 existing rate classification. Credit against the waiting
period

11 shall be as provided in subsection (7) of this section.

12 (7)(a) Except as provided in (b) of this subsection,
the pool

13 shall credit any preexisting condition waiting period in
its plans

14 for a person who was enrolled at any time during the
sixty-three

15 day period immediately preceding the date of application
for the

16 new pool plan ((in a group health benefit plan or an
individual

17 health benefit plan other than a catastrophic health
plan. The pool

18 must credit the period of coverage the person was
continuously

19 covered under the immediately preceding health plan)).
For the

20 person previously enrolled in a group health benefit
plan, the

21 pool must credit the aggregate of all periods of
preceding

22 coverage not separated by more than sixty-three days
toward the

23 waiting period of the new health plan. For the
person previously

24 enrolled in an individual health benefit plan other
than a

25 catastrophic health plan, the pool must credit the
period of

26 coverage the person was continuously covered under
the immediately

27 preceding health plan toward the waiting period
of the new health

28 plan. For the purposes of this subsection, a preceding
health plan

29 includes an employer-provided self-funded health plan.

30 (b) The pool shall waive any preexisting condition
waiting

31 period for a person who is an eligible individual as
defined in

32 section 2741(b) of the federal health insurance
portability and

33 accountability act of 1996 (42 U.S.C. 300gg-41(b)).

34 (8) If an application is made for the pool policy
as a result

35 of rejection by a carrier, then the date of
application to the

36 carrier, rather than to the pool, should govern for
purposes of

37 determining preexisting condition credit.

p. 13 SHB
1633

_1 Sec. 6. RCW
48.43.005 and 2000 c 79 s 18 are each amended to read

_2 as follows:

_3 Unless otherwise specifically provided, the
definitions in this

_4 section apply throughout this chapter.

_5 (1) "Adjusted community rate" means the
rating method used to

_6 establish the premium for health plans adjusted to
reflect

_7 actuarially demonstrated differences in utilization or
cost

_8 attributable to geographic region, age, family size, and
use of

_9 wellness activities.

10 (2) "Basic health plan" means the plan
described under chapter

11 70.47 RCW, as revised from time to time.

12 (3) "Basic health plan model plan"
means a health plan as

13 required in RCW 70.47.060(2)(d).

14 (4) "Basic health plan services"
means that schedule of covered

15 health services, including the description of how those
benefits

16 are to be administered, that are required to be
delivered to an

17 enrollee under the basic health plan, as revised from
time to

18 time.

19 (((4))) (5) "Catastrophic health
plan" means:

20 (a) In the case of a contract, agreement, or policy
covering a

21 single enrollee, a health benefit plan requiring a
calendar year

22 deductible of, at a minimum, one thousand five hundred
dollars and

23 an annual out-of-pocket expense required to be paid
under the plan

24 (other than for premiums) for covered benefits of at
least three

25 thousand dollars; and

26 (b) In the case of a contract, agreement, or policy
covering

27 more than one enrollee, a health benefit plan requiring
a calendar

28 year deductible of, at a minimum, three thousand dollars
and an

29 annual out-of-pocket expense required to be paid under
the plan

30 (other than for premiums) for covered benefits of at
least five

31 thousand five hundred dollars; or

32 (c) Any health benefit plan that provides benefits
for hospital

33 inpatient and outpatient services, professional and
prescription

34 drugs provided in conjunction with such hospital
inpatient and

35 outpatient services, and excludes or substantially
limits

36 outpatient physician services and those services usually
provided

37 in an office setting.

38 (((5))) (6) "Certification"
means a determination by a review

SHB 1633 p. 14

_1 organization that an admission, extension of stay, or
other health

_2 care service or procedure has been reviewed and, based
on the

_3 information provided, meets the clinical requirements
for medical

_4 necessity, appropriateness, level of care, or
effectiveness under

_5 the auspices of the applicable health benefit plan.

_6 (((6))) (7) "Concurrent
review" means utilization review

_7 conducted during a patient's hospital stay or course of
treatment.

_8 (((7))) (8) "Covered person"
or "enrollee" means a person

_9 covered by a health plan including an enrollee,
subscriber,

10 policyholder, beneficiary of a group plan, or individual
covered

11 by any other health plan.

12 (((8))) (9) "Dependent"
means, at a minimum, the enrollee's

13 legal spouse and unmarried dependent children who
qualify for

14 coverage under the enrollee's health benefit plan.

15 (((9))) (10) "Eligible
employee" means an employee who works on

16 a full-time basis with a normal work week of thirty or
more

17 hours. The term includes a self-employed individual,
including a

18 sole proprietor, a partner of a partnership, and may
include an

19 independent contractor, if the self-employed individual,
sole

20 proprietor, partner, or independent contractor is
included as an

21 employee under a health benefit plan of a small
employer, but does

22 not work less than thirty hours per week and derives at
least

23 seventy-five percent of his or her income from a trade
or business

24 through which he or she has attempted to earn taxable
income and

25 for which he or she has filed the appropriate internal
revenue

26 service form. Persons covered under a health benefit
plan pursuant

27 to the consolidated omnibus budget reconciliation act of
1986

28 shall not be considered eligible employees for purposes
of minimum

29 participation requirements of chapter 265, Laws of 1995.

30 (((10))) (11) "Emergency medical
condition" means the emergent

31 and acute onset of a symptom or symptoms, including
severe pain,

32 that would lead a prudent layperson acting reasonably to
believe

33 that a health condition exists that requires immediate
medical

34 attention, if failure to provide medical attention would
result in

35 serious impairment to bodily functions or serious
dysfunction of a

36 bodily organ or part, or would place the person's health
in

37 serious jeopardy.

38 (((11))) (12) "Emergency
services" means otherwise covered

p. 15 SHB
1633

_1 health care services medically necessary to evaluate and
treat an

_2 emergency medical condition, provided in a hospital
emergency

_3 department.

_4 (((12))) (13) "Enrollee
point-of-service cost-sharing" means

_5 amounts paid to health carriers directly providing
services,

_6 health care providers, or health care facilities by
enrollees and

_7 may include copayments, coinsurance, or deductibles.

_8 (((13))) (14) "Grievance"
means a written complaint submitted

_9 by or on behalf of a covered person regarding: (a)
Denial of

10 payment for medical services or nonprovision of medical
services

11 included in the covered person's health benefit plan, or
(b)

12 service delivery issues other than denial of payment for
medical

13 services or nonprovision of medical services, including

14 dissatisfaction with medical care, waiting time for
medical

15 services, provider or staff attitude or demeanor, or

16 dissatisfaction with service provided by the health
carrier.

17 (((14))) (15) "Health care
facility" or "facility" means

18 hospices licensed under chapter 70.127 RCW, hospitals
licensed

19 under chapter 70.41 RCW, rural health care facilities as
defined

20 in RCW 70.175.020, psychiatric hospitals licensed under
chapter

21 71.12 RCW, nursing homes licensed under chapter 18.51
RCW,

22 community mental health centers licensed under chapter
71.05 or

23 71.24 RCW, kidney disease treatment centers licensed
under chapter

24 70.41 RCW, ambulatory diagnostic, treatment, or surgical

25 facilities licensed under chapter 70.41 RCW, drug and
alcohol

26 treatment facilities licensed under chapter 70.96A RCW,
and home

27 health agencies licensed under chapter 70.127 RCW, and
includes

28 such facilities if owned and operated by a political
subdivision

29 or instrumentality of the state and such other facilities
as

30 required by federal law and implementing regulations.

31 (((15))) (16) "Health care
provider" or "provider" means:

32 (a) A person regulated under Title 18 or chapter
70.127 RCW, to

33 practice health or health-related services or otherwise
practicing

34 health care services in this state consistent with state
law; or

35 (b) An employee or agent of a person described in
(a) of this

36 subsection, acting in the course and scope of his or her

37 employment.

38 (((16))) (17) "Health care
service" means that service offered

SHB 1633 p. 16

_1 or provided by health care facilities and health care
providers

_2 relating to the prevention, cure, or treatment of
illness, injury,

_3 or disease.

_4 (((17))) (18) "Health
carrier" or "carrier" means a disability

_5 insurer regulated under chapter 48.20 or 48.21 RCW, a
health care

_6 service contractor as defined in RCW 48.44.010, or a
health

_7 maintenance organization as defined in RCW 48.46.020.

_8 (((18))) (19) "Health plan"
or "health benefit plan" means any

_9 policy, contract, or agreement offered by a health
carrier to

10 provide, arrange, reimburse, or pay for health care
services

11 except the following:

12 (a) Long-term care insurance governed by chapter
48.84 RCW;

13 (b) Medicare supplemental health insurance governed
by chapter

14 48.66 RCW;

15 (c) Limited health care services offered by limited
health care

16 service contractors in accordance with RCW 48.44.035;

17 (d) Disability income;

18 (e) Coverage incidental to a property/casualty
liability

19 insurance policy such as automobile personal injury
protection

20 coverage and homeowner guest medical;

21 (f) Workers' compensation coverage;

22 (g) Accident only coverage;

23 (h) Specified disease and hospital confinement
indemnity when

24 marketed solely as a supplement to a health plan;

25 (i) Employer-sponsored self-funded health plans;

26 (j) Dental only and vision only coverage; and

27 (k) Plans deemed by the insurance commissioner to
have a short-

28 term limited purpose or duration, or to be a
student-only plan

29 that is guaranteed renewable while the covered person is
enrolled

30 as a regular full-time undergraduate or graduate student
at an

31 accredited higher education institution, after a written
request

32 for such classification by the carrier and subsequent
written

33 approval by the insurance commissioner.

34 (((19))) (20) "Material
modification" means a change in the

35 actuarial value of the health plan as modified of more
than five

36 percent but less than fifteen percent.

37 (((20))) (21) "Preexisting
condition" means any medical

p. 17 SHB
1633

_1 condition, illness, or injury that existed any time
prior to the

_2 effective date of coverage.

_3 (((21))) (22) "Premium"
means all sums charged, received, or

_4 deposited by a health carrier as consideration for a
health plan

_5 or the continuance of a health plan. Any assessment or
any

_6 "membership," "policy,"
"contract," "service," or similar fee or

_7 charge made by a health carrier in consideration for a
health plan

_8 is deemed part of the premium. "Premium"
shall not include amounts

_9 paid as enrollee point-of-service cost-sharing.

10 (((22))) (23) "Review
organization" means a disability insurer

11 regulated under chapter 48.20 or 48.21 RCW, health care
service

12 contractor as defined in RCW 48.44.010, or health
maintenance

13 organization as defined in RCW 48.46.020, and entities
affiliated

14 with, under contract with, or acting on behalf of a
health carrier

15 to perform a utilization review.

16 (((23))) (24) "Small
employer" or "small group" means any

17 person, firm, corporation, partnership, association,
political

18 subdivision except school districts, or self-employed
individual

19 that is actively engaged in business that, on at least
fifty

20 percent of its working days during the preceding
calendar quarter,

21 employed no more than fifty eligible employees, with a
normal work

22 week of thirty or more hours, the majority of whom were
employed

23 within this state, and is not formed primarily for
purposes of

24 buying health insurance and in which a bona fide
employer-employee

25 relationship exists. In determining the number of
eligible

26 employees, companies that are affiliated companies, or
that are

27 eligible to file a combined tax return for purposes of
taxation by

28 this state, shall be considered an employer. Subsequent
to the

29 issuance of a health plan to a small employer and for
the purpose

30 of determining eligibility, the size of a small employer
shall be

31 determined annually. Except as otherwise specifically
provided, a

32 small employer shall continue to be considered a small
employer

33 until the plan anniversary following the date the small
employer

34 no longer meets the requirements of this definition.
The term

35 "small employer" includes a self-employed
individual or sole

36 proprietor. The term "small employer" also
includes a self-employed

37 individual or sole proprietor who derives at least
seventy-five

38 percent of his or her income from a trade or business
through

SHB 1633 p. 18

_1 which the individual or sole proprietor has attempted to
earn

_2 taxable income and for which he or she has filed the
appropriate

_3 internal revenue service form 1040, schedule C or F, for
the

_4 previous taxable year.

_5 (((24))) (25) "Utilization
review" means the prospective,

_6 concurrent, or retrospective assessment of the necessity
and

_7 appropriateness of the allocation of health care
resources and

_8 services of a provider or facility, given or proposed to
be given

_9 to an enrollee or group of enrollees.

10 (((25))) (26) "Wellness
activity" means an explicit program of

11 an activity consistent with department of health
guidelines, such

12 as, smoking cessation, injury and accident prevention,
reduction

13 of alcohol misuse, appropriate weight reduction,
exercise,

14 automobile and motorcycle safety, blood cholesterol
reduction, and

15 nutrition education for the purpose of improving enrollee
health

16 status and reducing health service costs.

17 Sec. 7. RCW
48.43.012 and 2000 c 79 s 19 are each amended to read

18 as follows:

19 (1) No carrier may reject an individual for an
individual

20 health benefit plan based upon preexisting conditions of
the

21 individual except as provided in RCW 48.43.018.

22 (2) No carrier may deny, exclude, or otherwise limit
coverage

23 for an individual's preexisting health conditions except
as

24 provided in this section.

25 (3) For an individual health benefit plan originally
issued on

26 or after March 23, 2000, preexisting condition waiting
periods

27 imposed upon a person enrolling in an individual health
benefit

28 plan shall be no more than nine months for a preexisting
condition

29 for which medical advice was given, for which a health
care

30 provider recommended or provided treatment, or for which
a prudent

31 layperson would have sought advice or treatment, within
six months

32 prior to the effective date of the plan. No carrier
may impose a

33 preexisting condition waiting period on an individual
health

34 benefit plan issued to an eligible individual as
defined in

35 section 2741(b) of the federal health insurance
portability and

36 accountability act of 1996 (42 U.S.C. 300gg-41(b)).

p. 19 SHB
1633

_1 (4) Individual health benefit plan preexisting
condition

_2 waiting periods shall not apply to prenatal care
services.

_3 (5) No carrier may avoid the requirements of this
section

_4 through the creation of a new rate classification or the

_5 modification of an existing rate classification. A new
or changed

_6 rate classification will be deemed an attempt to avoid
the

_7 provisions of this section if the new or changed
classification

_8 would substantially discourage applications for coverage
from

_9 individuals who are higher than average health risks.
These

10 provisions apply only to individuals who are Washington
residents.

11 Sec. 8. RCW 48.43.015
and 2000 c 80 s 3 are each amended to read

12 as follows:

13 (1) ((For a health benefit plan offered to a
group other than a

14 small group, every health carrier shall reduce any
preexisting

15 condition exclusion or limitation for persons or
groups who had

16 similar health coverage under a different health plan
at any time

17 during the three-month period immediately preceding
the date of

18 application for the new health plan if such person
was

19 continuously covered under the immediately preceding
health plan.

20 If the person was continuously covered for at least
three months

21 under the immediately preceding health plan, the
carrier may not

22 impose a waiting period for coverage of preexisting
conditions. If

23 the person was continuously covered for less than
three months

24 under the immediately preceding health plan, the
carrier must

25 credit any waiting period under the immediately
preceding health

26 plan toward the new health plan. For the purposes of
this

27 subsection, a preceding health plan includes an
employer-provided

28 self-funded health plan and plans of the Washington
state health

29 insurance pool.

30 (2) For a health benefit plan offered to a small
group, every

31 health carrier shall reduce any preexisting condition
exclusion or

32 limitation for persons or groups who had similar
health coverage

33 under a different health plan at any time during the
three-month

34 period immediately preceding the date of application
for the new

35 health plan if such person was continuously covered
under the

36 immediately preceding health plan. If the person was
continuously

37 covered for at least nine months under the
immediately preceding

SHB 1633 p. 20

_1 health plan, the carrier may not impose a waiting
period for

_2 coverage of preexisting conditions. If the person
was continuously

_3 covered for less than nine months under the
immediately preceding

_4 health plan, the carrier must credit any waiting
period under the

_5 immediately preceding health plan toward the new
health plan. For

_6 the purposes of this subsection, a preceding health
plan includes

_7 an employer‑provided self-funded health plan
and plans of the

_8 Washington state health insurance pool.

_9 (3))) For a health benefit plan offered to
a group, every

10 health carrier shall reduce any preexisting condition
exclusion,

11 limitation, or waiting period in the group health
plan in

12 accordance with the provisions of section 2701 of the
federal

13 health insurance portability and accountability act
of 1996 (42

14 U.S.C. Sec. 300gg).

15 (2) For a health benefit plan offered to a group
other than a

16 small group:

17 (a) If the individual applicant's immediately
preceding health

18 plan coverage terminated during the period beginning
ninety days

19 and ending sixty-four days before the date of
application for the

20 new plan and such coverage was similar and continuous
for at least

21 three months, then the carrier shall not impose a
waiting period

22 for coverage of preexisting conditions under the new
health plan.

23 (b) If the individual applicant's immediately
preceding health

24 plan coverage terminated during the period beginning
ninety days

25 and ending sixty-four days before the date of
application for the

26 new plan and such coverage was similar and continuous
for less

27 than three months, then the carrier shall credit the
time covered

28 under the immediately preceding health plan toward
any preexisting

29 condition waiting period under the new health plan.

30 (c) For the purposes of this subsection, a
preceding health

31 plan includes an employer-provided self-funded health
plan and

32 plans of the Washington state health insurance pool.

33 (3) For a health benefit plan offered to a small
group:

34 (a) If the individual applicant's immediately
preceding health

35 plan coverage terminated during the period beginning
ninety days

36 and ending sixty-four days before the date of
application for the

37 new plan and such coverage was similar and continuous
for at least

p. 21 SHB
1633

_1 nine months, then the carrier shall not impose a
waiting period

_2 for coverage of preexisting conditions under the new
health plan.

_3 (b) If the individual applicant's immediately
preceding health

_4 plan coverage terminated during the period beginning
ninety days

_5 and ending sixty-four days before the date of
application for the

_6 new plan and such coverage was similar and continuous
for less

_7 than nine months, then the carrier shall credit the
time covered

_8 under the immediately preceding health plan toward
any preexisting

_9 condition waiting period under the new health plan.

10 (c) For the purpose of this subsection, a
preceding health plan

11 includes an employer-provided self-funded health plan
and plans of

12 the Washington state health insurance pool.

13 (4) For a health benefit plan offered to an
individual, other

14 than an individual to whom subsection (((4))) (5)
of this section

15 applies, every health carrier shall credit any
preexisting

16 condition waiting period in that plan for a person who
was

17 enrolled at any time during the sixty-three day period
immediately

18 preceding the date of application for the new health
plan in a

19 group health benefit plan or an individual health
benefit plan,

20 other than a catastrophic health plan, and (a) the
benefits under

21 the previous plan provide equivalent or greater overall
benefit

22 coverage than that provided in the health benefit plan
the

23 individual seeks to purchase; or (b) the person is
seeking an

24 individual health benefit plan due to his or her change
of

25 residence from one geographic area in Washington state
to another

26 geographic area in Washington state where his or her
current

27 health plan is not offered, if application for coverage
is made

28 within ninety days of relocation; or (c) the person is
seeking an

29 individual health benefit plan: (i) Because a health
care provider

30 with whom he or she has an established care relationship
and from

31 whom he or she has received treatment within the past
twelve

32 months is no longer part of the carrier's provider
network under

33 his or her existing Washington individual health benefit
plan; and

34 (ii) his or her health care provider is part of another
carrier's

35 provider network; and (iii) application for a health
benefit plan

36 under that carrier's provider network individual
coverage is made

37 within ninety days of his or her provider leaving the
previous

38 carrier's provider network. The carrier must credit the
period of

SHB 1633 p. 22

_1 coverage the person was continuously covered under the
immediately

_2 preceding health plan toward the waiting period of the
new health

_3 plan. For the purposes of this subsection (((3)))
(4), a preceding

_4 health plan includes an employer-provided self-funded
health plan

_5 and plans of the Washington state health insurance pool.

_6 (((4))) (5) Every health carrier shall
waive any preexisting

_7 condition waiting period in its individual plans for a
person who

_8 is an eligible individual as defined in section 2741(b)
of the

_9 federal health insurance portability and accountability
act of

10 1996 (42 U.S.C. Sec. 300gg-41(b)).

11 (((5))) (6) Subject to the provisions
of subsections (1)

12 through (((4))) (5) of this section,
nothing contained in this

13 section requires a health carrier to amend a health plan
to

14 provide new benefits in its existing health plans. In
addition,

15 nothing in this section requires a carrier to waive
benefit

16 limitations not related to an individual or group's
preexisting

17 conditions or health history.

18 Sec. 9. RCW
48.43.018 and 2000 c 80 s 4 are each amended to read

19 as follows:

20 (1) Except as provided in (a) through (c) of this
subsection, a

21 health carrier may require any person applying for an
individual

22 health benefit plan to complete the standard health
questionnaire

23 designated under chapter 48.41 RCW.

24 (a) If a person is seeking an individual health
benefit plan

25 due to his or her change of residence from one
geographic area in

26 Washington state to another geographic area in
Washington state

27 where his or her current health plan is not offered,
completion of

28 the standard health questionnaire shall not be a
condition of

29 coverage if application for coverage is made within
ninety days of

30 relocation.

31 (b) If a person is seeking an individual health
benefit plan:

32 (i) Because a health care provider with whom he or
she has an

33 established care relationship and from whom he or she
has received

34 treatment within the past twelve months is no longer
part of the

35 carrier's provider network under his or her existing
Washington

36 individual health benefit plan; and

37 (ii) His or her health care provider is part of
another

p. 23 SHB
1633

_1 carrier's provider network; and

_2 (iii) Application for a health benefit plan under
that

_3 carrier's provider network individual coverage is made
within

_4 ninety days of his or her provider leaving the previous
carrier's

_5 provider network; then completion of the standard health

_6 questionnaire shall not be a condition of coverage.

_7 (c) If a person is seeking an individual health
benefit plan

_8 due to his or her having exhausted continuation coverage
provided

_9 under 29 U.S.C. Sec. 1161 et seq., completion of the
standard

10 health questionnaire shall not be a condition of
coverage if

11 application for coverage is made within ninety days of
exhaustion

12 of continuation coverage. A health carrier shall
accept an

13 application without a standard health questionnaire
from a person

14 currently covered by such continuation coverage if
application is

15 made within ninety days prior to the date the
continuation

16 coverage would be exhausted and the effective date of
the

17 individual coverage applied for is the date the
continuation

18 coverage would be exhausted, or within ninety days
thereafter.

19 (2) If, based upon the results of the standard
health

20 questionnaire, the person qualifies for coverage under
the

21 Washington state health insurance pool, the following
shall apply:

22 (a) The carrier may decide not to accept the
person's

23 application for enrollment in its individual health
benefit plan;

24 and

25 (b) Within fifteen business days of receipt of a
completed

26 application, the carrier shall provide written notice of
the

27 decision not to accept the person's application for
enrollment to

28 both the person and the administrator of the Washington
state

29 health insurance pool. The notice to the person shall
state that

30 the person is eligible for health insurance provided by
the

31 Washington state health insurance pool, and shall
include

32 information about the Washington state health insurance
pool and

33 an application for such coverage. If the carrier
does not provide

34 or postmark such notice within fifteen business days,
the

35 application is deemed approved.

36 (3) If the person applying for an individual health
benefit

37 plan: (a) Does not qualify for coverage under the
Washington state

38 health insurance pool based upon the results of the
standard

SHB 1633 p. 24

_1 health questionnaire; (b) does qualify for coverage
under the

_2 Washington state health insurance pool based upon the
results of

_3 the standard health questionnaire and the carrier elects
to accept

_4 the person for enrollment; or (c) is not required to complete
the

_5 standard health questionnaire designated under this
chapter under

_6 subsection (1)(a) or (b) of this section, the carrier
shall accept

_7 the person for enrollment if he or she resides within
the

_8 carrier's service area and provide or assure the
provision of all

_9 covered services regardless of age, sex, family
structure,

10 ethnicity, race, health condition, geographic location,
employment

11 status, socioeconomic status, other condition or
situation, or the

12 provisions of RCW 49.60.174(2). The commissioner may
grant a

13 temporary exemption from this subsection if, upon
application by a

14 health carrier, the commissioner finds that the
clinical,

15 financial, or administrative capacity to serve existing
enrollees

16 will be impaired if a health carrier is required to
continue

17 enrollment of additional eligible individuals.

18 Sec. 10. RCW
48.43.025 and 2000 c 79 s 23 are each amended to read

19 as follows:

20 (1) For group health benefit plans for groups other
than small

21 groups, no carrier may reject an individual for health
plan

22 coverage based upon preexisting conditions of the
individual and

23 no carrier may deny, exclude, or otherwise limit
coverage for an

24 individual's preexisting health conditions; except that
a carrier

25 may impose a three-month benefit waiting period for
preexisting

26 conditions for which medical advice was given, or for
which a

27 health care provider recommended or provided treatment((,
or for

28 which a prudent layperson would have sought advice or
treatment,))

29 within three months before the effective date of
coverage. Any

30 preexisting condition waiting period or limitation
relating to

31 pregnancy as a preexisting condition shall be imposed
only to the

32 extent allowed in the federal health insurance
portability and

33 accountability act of 1996.

34 (2) For group health benefit plans for small groups,
no carrier

35 may reject an individual for health plan coverage based
upon

36 preexisting conditions of the individual and no carrier
may deny,

37 exclude, or otherwise limit coverage for an individual's

p. 25 SHB
1633

_1 preexisting health conditions. Except that a carrier
may impose a

_2 nine-month benefit waiting period for preexisting
conditions for

_3 which medical advice was given, or for which a health
care

_4 provider recommended or provided treatment((, or for
which a

_5 prudent layperson would have sought advice or
treatment,)) within

_6 six months before the effective date of coverage. Any
preexisting

_7 condition waiting period or limitation relating to
pregnancy as a

_8 preexisting condition shall be imposed only to the
extent allowed

_9 in the federal health insurance portability and
accountability act

10 of 1996.

11 (3) No carrier may avoid the requirements of this
section

12 through the creation of a new rate classification or the

13 modification of an existing rate classification. A new
or changed

14 rate classification will be deemed an attempt to avoid
the

15 provisions of this section if the new or changed
classification

16 would substantially discourage applications for coverage
from

17 individuals or groups who are higher than average health
risks.

18 These provisions apply only to individuals who are
Washington

19 residents.

20 NEW SECTION. Sec. 11. A new section is
added to chapter 48.43

21 RCW to read as follows:

22 To the extent required of the federal health insurance

23 portability and accountability act of 1996, the
eligibility of an

24 employer or group to purchase a health benefit plan set
forth in

25 RCW 48.21.045(1)(b), 48.44.023(1)(b), and
48.46.066(1)(b) must be

26 extended to all small employers and small groups as
defined in RCW

27 48.43.005.

28 Sec. 12. RCW
48.44.017 and 2000 c 79 s 29 are each amended to read

29 as follows:

30 (1) The definitions in this subsection apply
throughout this

31 section unless the context clearly requires otherwise.

32 (a) "Claims" means the cost to the health
care service

33 contractor of health care services, as defined in RCW
48.43.005,

34 provided to a contract holder or paid to or on behalf of
a

35 contract holder in accordance with the terms of a health
benefit

SHB 1633 p. 26

_1 plan, as defined in RCW 48.43.005. This includes
capitation

_2 payments or other similar payments made to providers for
the

_3 purpose of paying for health care services for an
enrollee.

_4 (b) "Claims reserves" means: (i) The
liability for claims which

_5 have been reported but not paid; (ii) the liability for
claims

_6 which have not been reported but which may reasonably be
expected;

_7 (iii) active life reserves; and (iv) additional claims
reserves

_8 whether for a specific liability purpose or not.

_9 (c) "Earned premiums" means premiums, as
defined in RCW

10 48.43.005, plus any rate credits or recoupments less any
refunds,

11 for the applicable period, whether received before,
during, or

12 after the applicable period.

13 (d) "Incurred claims expense" means claims
paid during the

14 applicable period plus any increase, or less any
decrease, in the

15 claims reserves.

16 (e) "Loss ratio" means incurred claims
expense as a percentage

17 of earned premiums.

18 (f) "Reserves" means: (i) Active life
reserves; and (ii)

19 additional reserves whether for a specific liability
purpose or

20 not.

21 (2) A health care service contractor shall file, for

22 informational purposes only, a notice of its schedule of
rates for

23 its individual contracts with the commissioner prior to
use.

24 (3) A health care service contractor shall file with
the notice

25 required under subsection (2) of this section supporting

26 documentation of its method of determining the rates
charged. The

27 commissioner may request only the following supporting

28 documentation:

29 (a) A description of the health care service
contractor's rate-

30 making methodology;

31 (b) An actuarially determined estimate of incurred
claims which

32 includes the experience data, assumptions, and
justifications of

33 the health care service contractor's projection;

34 (c) The percentage of premium attributable in
aggregate for

35 nonclaims expenses used to determine the adjusted
community rates

36 charged; and

37 (d) A certification by a member of the American
academy of

38 actuaries, or other person approved by the commissioner,
that the

p. 27 SHB
1633

_1 adjusted community rate charged can be reasonably
expected to

_2 result in a loss ratio that meets or exceeds the loss
ratio

_3 standard established in subsection (7) of this section.

_4 (4) The commissioner may not disapprove or otherwise
impede the

_5 implementation of the filed rates.

_6 (5) By the last day of May each year any health care
service

_7 contractor ((providing)) issuing or renewing
individual health

_8 benefit plans in this state during the preceding
calendar year

_9 shall file for review by the commissioner supporting
documentation

10 of its actual loss ratio for its individual health
benefit plans

11 offered or renewed in this state in aggregate for
the preceding

12 calendar year. The filing shall include aggregate earned
premiums,

13 aggregate incurred claims, and a certification by
a member of the

14 American academy of actuaries, or other person approved
by the

15 commissioner, that the actual loss ratio has been
calculated in

16 accordance with accepted actuarial principles.

17 (a) At the expiration of a thirty-day period
beginning with the

18 date the filing is ((delivered to)) received
by the commissioner,

19 the filing shall be deemed approved unless prior thereto
the

20 commissioner contests the calculation of the actual loss
ratio.

21 (b) If the commissioner contests the calculation of
the actual

22 loss ratio, the commissioner shall state in writing the
grounds

23 for contesting the calculation to the health care
service

24 contractor.

25 (c) Any dispute regarding the calculation of the
actual loss

26 ratio shall upon written demand of either the
commissioner or the

27 health care service contractor be submitted to hearing
under

28 chapters 48.04 and 34.05 RCW.

29 (6) If the actual loss ratio for the preceding
calendar year is

30 less than the loss ratio standard established in
subsection (7) of

31 this section, a remittance is due and the following
shall apply:

32 (a) The health care service contractor shall
calculate a

33 percentage of premium to be remitted to the Washington
state

34 health insurance pool by subtracting the actual loss
ratio for the

35 preceding year from the loss ratio established in
subsection (7)

36 of this section.

37 (b) The remittance to the Washington state health
insurance

38 pool is the percentage calculated in (a) of this
subsection,

SHB 1633 p. 28

_1 multiplied by the premium earned from each enrollee in
the

_2 previous calendar year. Interest shall be added to the
remittance

_3 due at a five percent annual rate calculated from the
end of the

_4 calendar year for which the remittance is due to the
date the

_5 remittance is made.

_6 (c) All remittances shall be aggregated and such
amounts shall

_7 be remitted to the Washington state high risk pool to be
used as

_8 directed by the pool board of directors.

_9 (d) Any remittance required to be issued under this
section

10 shall be issued within thirty days after the actual loss
ratio is

11 deemed approved under subsection (5)(a) of this section
or the

12 determination by an administrative law judge under
subsection

13 (5)(c) of this section.

14 (7) The loss ratio applicable to this section shall
be seventy-

15 four percent minus the premium tax rate applicable to
the health

16 care service contractor's individual health benefit
plans under

17 RCW 48.14.0201.

18 Sec. 13. RCW
48.46.062 and 2000 c 79 s 32 are each amended to read

19 as follows:

20 (1) The definitions in this subsection apply
throughout this

21 section unless the context clearly requires otherwise.

22 (a) "Claims" means the cost to the health
maintenance

23 organization of health care services, as defined in RCW
48.43.005,

24 provided to an enrollee or paid to or on behalf of the
enrollee in

25 accordance with the terms of a health benefit plan, as
defined in

26 RCW 48.43.005. This includes capitation payments or
other similar

27 payments made to providers for the purpose of paying for
health

28 care services for an enrollee.

29 (b) "Claims reserves" means: (i) The
liability for claims which

30 have been reported but not paid; (ii) the liability for
claims

31 which have not been reported but which may reasonably be
expected;

32 (iii) active life reserves; and (iv) additional claims
reserves

33 whether for a specific liability purpose or not.

34 (c) "Earned premiums" means premiums, as
defined in RCW

35 48.43.005, plus any rate credits or recoupments less any
refunds,

36 for the applicable period, whether received before,
during, or

37 after the applicable period.

p. 29 SHB
1633

_1 (d) "Incurred claims expense" means claims
paid during the

_2 applicable period plus any increase, or less any
decrease, in the

_3 claims reserves.

_4 (e) "Loss ratio" means incurred claims
expense as a percentage

_5 of earned premiums.

_6 (f) "Reserves" means: (i) Active life
reserves; and (ii)

_7 additional reserves whether for a specific liability
purpose or

_8 not.

_9 (2) A health maintenance organization shall file,
for

10 informational purposes only, a notice of its schedule of
rates for

11 its individual agreements with the commissioner prior to
use.

12 (3) A health maintenance organization shall file
with the

13 notice required under subsection (2) of this section
supporting

14 documentation of its method of determining the rates
charged. The

15 commissioner may request only the following supporting

16 documentation:

17 (a) A description of the health maintenance organization's
rate-

18 making methodology;

19 (b) An actuarially determined estimate of incurred
claims which

20 includes the experience data, assumptions, and
justifications of

21 the health maintenance organization's projection;

22 (c) The percentage of premium attributable in
aggregate for

23 nonclaims expenses used to determine the adjusted
community rates

24 charged; and

25 (d) A certification by a member of the American
academy of

26 actuaries, or other person approved by the commissioner,
that the

27 adjusted community rate charged can be reasonably
expected to

28 result in a loss ratio that meets or exceeds the loss
ratio

29 standard established in subsection (7) of this section.

30 (4) The commissioner may not disapprove or otherwise
impede the

31 implementation of the filed rates.

32 (5) By the last day of May each year any health
maintenance

33 organization ((providing)) issuing or renewing
individual health

34 benefit plans in this state during the preceding
calendar year

35 shall file for review by the commissioner supporting
documentation

36 of its actual loss ratio for its individual health
benefit plans

37 offered or renewed in the state in aggregate for
the preceding

38 calendar year. The filing shall include aggregate
earned premiums,

SHB 1633 p. 30

_1 aggregate incurred claims, and a certification by
a member of the

_2 American academy of actuaries, or other person approved
by the

_3 commissioner, that the actual loss ratio has been
calculated in

_4 accordance with accepted actuarial principles.

_5 (a) At the expiration of a thirty-day period
beginning with the

_6 date the filing is ((delivered to)) received
by the commissioner,

_7 the filing shall be deemed approved unless prior thereto
the

_8 commissioner contests the calculation of the actual loss
ratio.

_9 (b) If the commissioner contests the calculation of
the actual

10 loss ratio, the commissioner shall state in writing the
grounds

11 for contesting the calculation to the health maintenance

12 organization.

13 (c) Any dispute regarding the calculation of the
actual loss

14 ratio shall, upon written demand of either the
commissioner or the

15 health maintenance organization, be submitted to hearing
under

16 chapters 48.04 and 34.05 RCW.

17 (6) If the actual loss ratio for the preceding
calendar year is

18 less than the loss ratio standard established in
subsection (7) of

19 this section, a remittance is due and the following
shall apply:

20 (a) The health maintenance organization shall
calculate a

21 percentage of premium to be remitted to the Washington
state

22 health insurance pool by subtracting the actual loss
ratio for the

23 preceding year from the loss ratio established in
subsection (7)

24 of this section.

25 (b) The remittance to the Washington state health
insurance

26 pool is the percentage calculated in (a) of this
subsection,

27 multiplied by the premium earned from each enrollee in
the

28 previous calendar year. Interest shall be added to the
remittance

29 due at a five percent annual rate calculated from the
end of the

30 calendar year for which the remittance is due to the
date the

31 remittance is made.

32 (c) All remittances shall be aggregated and such
amounts shall

33 be remitted to the Washington state high risk pool to be
used as

34 directed by the pool board of directors.

35 (d) Any remittance required to be issued under this
section

36 shall be issued within thirty days after the actual loss
ratio is

37 deemed approved under subsection (5)(a) of this section
or the

p. 31 SHB
1633

_1 determination by an administrative law judge under
subsection

_2 (5)(c) of this section.

_3 (7) The loss ratio applicable to this section shall
be seventy-

_4 four percent minus the premium tax rate applicable to
the health

_5 maintenance organization's individual health benefit
plans under

_6 RCW 48.14.0201.

_7 Sec. 14. RCW
70.47.060 and 2000 c 79 s 34 are each amended to read

_8 as follows:

_9 The administrator has the following powers and duties:

10 (1) To design and from time to time revise a
schedule of

11 covered basic health care services, including physician
services,

12 inpatient and outpatient hospital services, prescription
drugs and

13 medications, and other services that may be necessary
for basic

14 health care. In addition, the administrator may, to the
extent that

15 funds are available, offer as basic health plan services
chemical

16 dependency services, mental health services and organ
transplant

17 services; however, no one service or any combination of
these

18 three services shall increase the actuarial value of the
basic

19 health plan benefits by more than five percent excluding

20 inflation, as determined by the office of financial
management.

21 All subsidized and nonsubsidized enrollees in any
participating

22 managed health care system under the Washington basic
health plan

23 shall be entitled to receive covered basic health care
services in

24 return for premium payments to the plan. The schedule
of services

25 shall emphasize proven preventive and primary health
care and

26 shall include all services necessary for prenatal,
postnatal, and

27 well-child care. However, with respect to coverage for
subsidized

28 enrollees who are eligible to receive prenatal and postnatal

29 services through the medical assistance program under
chapter

30 74.09 RCW, the administrator shall not contract for such
services

31 except to the extent that such services are necessary
over not

32 more than a one-month period in order to maintain
continuity of

33 care after diagnosis of pregnancy by the managed care
provider.

34 The schedule of services shall also include a separate
schedule of

35 basic health care services for children, eighteen years
of age and

36 younger, for those subsidized or nonsubsidized enrollees
who

37 choose to secure basic coverage through the plan only
for their

SHB 1633 p. 32

_1 dependent children. In designing and revising the
schedule of

_2 services, the administrator shall consider the guidelines
for

_3 assessing health services under the mandated benefits
act of 1984,

_4 RCW 48.47.030, and such other factors as the
administrator deems

_5 appropriate.

_6 (2)(a) To design and implement a structure of
periodic premiums

_7 due the administrator from subsidized enrollees that is
based upon

_8 gross family income, giving appropriate consideration to
family

_9 size and the ages of all family members. The enrollment
of children

10 shall not require the enrollment of their parent or
parents who

11 are eligible for the plan. The structure of periodic
premiums shall

12 be applied to subsidized enrollees entering the plan as

13 individuals pursuant to subsection (9) of this section
and to the

14 share of the cost of the plan due from subsidized enrollees

15 entering the plan as employees pursuant to subsection
(10) of this

16 section.

17 (b) To determine the periodic premiums due the
administrator

18 from nonsubsidized enrollees. Premiums due from
nonsubsidized

19 enrollees shall be in an amount equal to the cost
charged by the

20 managed health care system provider to the state for the
plan plus

21 the administrative cost of providing the plan to those
enrollees

22 and the premium tax under RCW 48.14.0201.

23 (c) An employer or other financial sponsor may, with
the prior

24 approval of the administrator, pay the premium, rate, or
any other

25 amount on behalf of a subsidized or nonsubsidized
enrollee, by

26 arrangement with the enrollee and through a mechanism
acceptable

27 to the administrator.

28 (d) To develop, as an offering by every health
carrier

29 providing coverage identical to the basic health
plan, as

30 configured on January 1, 2001, a basic health plan
model plan with

31 uniformity in enrollee cost-sharing requirements.

32 (3) To design and implement a structure of enrollee
cost-

33 sharing due a managed health care system from subsidized
and

34 nonsubsidized enrollees. The structure shall discourage

35 inappropriate enrollee utilization of health care
services, and

36 may utilize copayments, deductibles, and other
cost-sharing

37 mechanisms, but shall not be so costly to enrollees as
to

p. 33 SHB
1633

_1 constitute a barrier to appropriate utilization of
necessary

_2 health care services.

_3 (4) To limit enrollment of persons who qualify for
subsidies so

_4 as to prevent an overexpenditure of appropriations for
such

_5 purposes. Whenever the administrator finds that there
is danger of

_6 such an overexpenditure, the administrator shall close
enrollment

_7 until the administrator finds the danger no longer
exists.

_8 (5) To limit the payment of subsidies to subsidized
enrollees,

_9 as defined in RCW 70.47.020. The level of subsidy
provided to

10 persons who qualify may be based on the lowest cost plans,
as

11 defined by the administrator.

12 (6) To adopt a schedule for the orderly development
of the

13 delivery of services and availability of the plan to
residents of

14 the state, subject to the limitations contained in RCW
70.47.080

15 or any act appropriating funds for the plan.

16 (7) To solicit and accept applications from managed
health care

17 systems, as defined in this chapter, for inclusion as
eligible

18 basic health care providers under the plan for either
subsidized

19 enrollees, or nonsubsidized enrollees, or both. The
administrator

20 shall endeavor to assure that covered basic health care
services

21 are available to any enrollee of the plan from among a
selection

22 of two or more participating managed health care
systems. In

23 adopting any rules or procedures applicable to managed
health care

24 systems and in its dealings with such systems, the
administrator

25 shall consider and make suitable allowance for the need
for health

26 care services and the differences in local availability
of health

27 care resources, along with other resources, within and
among the

28 several areas of the state. Contracts with
participating managed

29 health care systems shall ensure that basic health plan
enrollees

30 who become eligible for medical assistance may, at their
option,

31 continue to receive services from their existing
providers within

32 the managed health care system if such providers have
entered into

33 provider agreements with the department of social and
health

34 services.

35 (8) To receive periodic premiums from or on behalf
of

36 subsidized and nonsubsidized enrollees, deposit them in
the basic

37 health plan operating account, keep records of enrollee
status,

SHB 1633 p. 34

_1 and authorize periodic payments to managed health care
systems on

_2 the basis of the number of enrollees participating in
the

_3 respective managed health care systems.

_4 (9) To accept applications from individuals residing
in areas

_5 served by the plan, on behalf of themselves and their
spouses and

_6 dependent children, for enrollment in the Washington
basic health

_7 plan as subsidized or nonsubsidized enrollees, to
establish

_8 appropriate minimum-enrollment periods for enrollees as
may be

_9 necessary, and to determine, upon application and on a
reasonable

10 schedule defined by the authority, or at the request of
any

11 enrollee, eligibility due to current gross family income
for

12 sliding scale premiums. Funds received by a family as
part of

13 participation in the adoption support program authorized
under RCW

14 26.33.320 and 74.13.100 through 74.13.145 shall not be
counted

15 toward a family's current gross family income for the
purposes of

16 this chapter. When an enrollee fails to report income
or income

17 changes accurately, the administrator shall have the
authority

18 either to bill the enrollee for the amounts overpaid by
the state

19 or to impose civil penalties of up to two hundred
percent of the

20 amount of subsidy overpaid due to the enrollee
incorrectly

21 reporting income. The administrator shall adopt rules
to define the

22 appropriate application of these sanctions and the
processes to

23 implement the sanctions provided in this subsection,
within

24 available resources. No subsidy may be paid with
respect to any

25 enrollee whose current gross family income exceeds twice
the

26 federal poverty level or, subject to RCW 70.47.110, who
is a

27 recipient of medical assistance or medical care services
under

28 chapter 74.09 RCW. If a number of enrollees drop their
enrollment

29 for no apparent good cause, the administrator may
establish

30 appropriate rules or requirements that are applicable to
such

31 individuals before they will be allowed to reenroll in
the plan.

32 (10) To accept applications from business owners on
behalf of

33 themselves and their employees, spouses, and dependent
children,

34 as subsidized or nonsubsidized enrollees, who reside in
an area

35 served by the plan. The administrator may require all
or the

36 substantial majority of the eligible employees of such
businesses

37 to enroll in the plan and establish those procedures
necessary to

38 facilitate the orderly enrollment of groups in the plan
and into a

p. 35 SHB
1633

_1 managed health care system. The administrator may
require that a

_2 business owner pay at least an amount equal to what the
employee

_3 pays after the state pays its portion of the subsidized
premium

_4 cost of the plan on behalf of each employee enrolled in
the plan.

_5 Enrollment is limited to those not eligible for medicare
who wish

_6 to enroll in the plan and choose to obtain the basic
health care

_7 coverage and services from a managed care system
participating in

_8 the plan. The administrator shall adjust the amount
determined to

_9 be due on behalf of or from all such enrollees whenever
the amount

10 negotiated by the administrator with the participating
managed

11 health care system or systems is modified or the
administrative

12 cost of providing the plan to such enrollees changes.

13 (11) To determine the rate to be paid to each
participating

14 managed health care system in return for the provision
of covered

15 basic health care services to enrollees in the system.
Although the

16 schedule of covered basic health care services will be
the same or

17 actuarially equivalent for similar enrollees, the rates
negotiated

18 with participating managed health care systems may vary
among the

19 systems. In negotiating rates with participating
systems, the

20 administrator shall consider the characteristics of the

21 populations served by the respective systems, economic

22 circumstances of the local area, the need to conserve
the

23 resources of the basic health plan trust account, and
other

24 factors the administrator finds relevant.

25 (12) To monitor the provision of covered services to
enrollees

26 by participating managed health care systems in order to
assure

27 enrollee access to good quality basic health care, to
require

28 periodic data reports concerning the utilization of
health care

29 services rendered to enrollees in order to provide
adequate

30 information for evaluation, and to inspect the books and
records

31 of participating managed health care systems to assure
compliance

32 with the purposes of this chapter. In requiring reports
from

33 participating managed health care systems, including
data on

34 services rendered enrollees, the administrator shall
endeavor to

35 minimize costs, both to the managed health care systems
and to the

36 plan. The administrator shall coordinate any such
reporting

37 requirements with other state agencies, such as the
insurance

SHB 1633 p. 36

_1 commissioner and the department of health, to minimize
duplication

_2 of effort.

_3 (13) To evaluate the effects this chapter has on
private

_4 employer-based health care coverage and to take
appropriate

_5 measures consistent with state and federal statutes that
will

_6 discourage the reduction of such coverage in the state.

_7 (14) To develop a program of proven preventive
health measures

_8 and to integrate it into the plan wherever possible and
consistent

_9 with this chapter.

10 (15) To provide, consistent with available funding,
assistance

11 for rural residents, underserved populations, and
persons of

12 color.

13 (16) In consultation with appropriate state and
local

14 government agencies, to establish criteria defining
eligibility

15 for persons confined or residing in government-operated

16 institutions.

17 (17) To administer the premium discounts provided
under RCW

18 48.41.200(3)(a) (i) and (ii) pursuant to a contract with
the

19 Washington state health insurance pool.

20 NEW SECTION. Sec. 15. This act is
necessary for the immediate

21 preservation of the public peace, health, or safety, or
support of

22 the state government and its existing public
institutions, and

23 takes effect immediately.

‑‑‑ END ‑‑‑

p. 37 SHB
1633