BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF
WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1. RCW 18.27.010 and 1997 c
314 s 2 are each amended to read as follows:

Unless the context
clearly requires otherwise, the definitions in this section apply throughout
this chapter.

(1)
"Contractor" means any person, firm, or corporation who or which, in
the pursuit of an independent business undertakes to, or offers to undertake,
or submits a bid to, construct, alter, repair, add to, subtract from, improve,
move, wreck or demolish, for another, any building, highway, road, railroad,
excavation or other structure, project, development, or improvement attached to
real estate or to do any part thereof including the installation of carpeting
or other floor covering, the erection of scaffolding or other structures or
works in connection therewith or who installs or repairs roofing or siding; or,
who, to do similar work upon his or her own property, employs members of more
than one trade upon a single job or project or under a single building permit
except as otherwise provided herein. "Contractor" includes any
person, firm, ((or)) corporation, or other entity covered by this
subsection, whether or not registered as required under this chapter.

(2) "Department"
means the department of labor and industries.

(3)
"Director" means the director of the department of labor and
industries or designated representative employed by the department.

(4)
"General contractor" means a contractor whose business operations
require the use of more than two unrelated building trades or crafts whose work
the contractor shall superintend or do in whole or in part. "General
contractor" shall not include an individual who does all work personally
without employees or other "specialty contractors" as defined in this
section. The terms "general contractor" and "builder" are
synonymous.

(((3))) (5)
"Partnership" means a business formed under Title 25 RCW.

(6)
"Registration cancellation" means a written notice from the
department that a contractor's action is in violation of this chapter and that
the contractor's registration has been revoked.

(7)
"Registration suspension" means a written notice from the department
that a contractor's action is a violation of this chapter and that the
contractor's registration has been suspended for a specified time, or until the
contractor shows evidence of compliance with this chapter.

(8)
"Residential homeowner" means an individual person or persons owning
or leasing real property upon which one single-family residence is to be built
or upon which there is a single-family residence to which improvements are to
be made and in which the owner or lessee intends to reside upon completion of
any construction.

(9)
"Specialty contractor" means a contractor whose operations do not
fall within the ((foregoing)) definition of "general
contractor".

(((4))) (10)
"Unregistered contractor" means a person, firm, ((or))
corporation, or other entity doing work as a contractor without being
registered in compliance with this chapter. "Unregistered
contractor" includes contractors whose registration is expired ((for
more than thirty days beyond the renewal date or has been)), revoked, or
suspended. "Unregistered contractor" does not include a
contractor who has maintained a valid bond and the insurance or assigned
account required by RCW 18.27.050, and whose registration has lapsed for thirty
or fewer days.

(((5)
"Department" means the department of labor and industries.

(6)
"Director" means the director of the department of labor and
industries.

(7))) (11) "Unsatisfied final judgment"
means a judgment that has not been satisfied either through payment, court
approved settlement, discharge in bankruptcy, or assignment under RCW
19.72.070.

(12)
"Verification" means the receipt and duplication by the city, town,
or county of a contractor registration card that is current on its face,
checking the department's contractor registration data base, or calling the
department to confirm that the contractor is registered.

Sec. 2. RCW 18.27.030 and 1998 c
279 s 3 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) An applicant for
registration as a contractor shall submit an application under oath upon a form
to be prescribed by the director and which shall include the following
information pertaining to the applicant:

(a) Employer social
security number.

(b) Unified business
identifier number, if required by the department of revenue.

(c) Evidence of
workers' compensation coverage for the applicant's employees working in
Washington, as follows:

(i) The applicant's
industrial insurance account number issued by the department;

(ii) The applicant's
self-insurer number issued by the department; or

(iii) For applicants
domiciled in a state or province of Canada subject to an agreement entered into
under RCW 51.12.120(7), as permitted by the agreement, filing a certificate of
coverage issued by the agency that administers the workers' compensation law in
the applicant's state or province of domicile certifying that the applicant has
secured the payment of compensation under the other state's or province's
workers' compensation law.

(((c))) (d)
Employment security department number.

(((d))) (e)
State excise tax registration number.

(((e))) (f)
Unified business identifier (UBI) account number may be substituted for the
information required by (((b))) (c) of this subsection if the
applicant will not employ employees in Washington, and by (((c))) (d)
and (((d))) (e) of this subsection.

(((f))) (g)
Type of contracting activity, whether a general or a specialty contractor and
if the latter, the type of specialty.

(((g))) (h)
The name and address of each partner if the applicant is a firm or partnership,
or the name and address of the owner if the applicant is an individual
proprietorship, or the name and address of the corporate officers and statutory
agent, if any, if the applicant is a corporation or the name and address of
all members of other business entities. The information contained in such
application is a matter of public record and open to public inspection.

(2) The department may
verify the workers' compensation coverage information provided by the applicant
under subsection (1)(((b))) (c) of this section, including but
not limited to information regarding the coverage of an individual employee of
the applicant. If coverage is provided under the laws of another state, the
department may notify the other state that the applicant is employing employees
in Washington.

(3)(a) The
department shall deny an application for registration if: (i) The
applicant has been previously ((registered)) performing work subject
to this chapter as a sole proprietor, partnership, ((or))
corporation, or other entity and the department has notice that
the applicant has an unsatisfied final judgment against him or her in an action
based on this chapter ((that was incurred during a previous registration
under this chapter)) or the applicant owes the department money for
penalties assessed or fees due under this chapter as a result of a final
judgment; (ii) the applicant was a principal or officer of a partnership,
corporation, or other entity that either has an unsatisfied final judgment
against it in an action that was incurred for work performed subject to this
chapter or owes the department money for penalties assessed or fees due under
this chapter as a result of a final judgment; or (iii) the applicant does not
have a valid unified business identifier number, if required by the department
of revenue.

(b) The department
shall suspend an active registration if (i) the department has notice that the
registrant is a sole proprietor or a principal or officer of a registered
contractor that has an unsatisfied final judgment against it for work under
this chapter; or (ii) the applicant does not maintain a valid unified business
identifier number, if required by the department of revenue.

(4) The department
shall not deny an application or suspend a registration because of an
unsatisfied final judgment if the applicant's or registrant's unsatisfied final
judgment was determined by the director to be the result of the fraud or
negligence of another party.

Sec. 3. RCW 18.27.040 and 1997 c
314 s 5 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) Each applicant
shall file with the department a surety bond issued by a surety insurer who
meets the requirements of chapter 48.28 RCW in the sum of ((six)) twelve
thousand dollars if the applicant is a general contractor and ((four)) six
thousand dollars if the applicant is a specialty contractor. If no valid bond
is already on file with the department at the time the application is filed, a
bond must accompany the registration application. The bond shall have the
state of Washington named as obligee with good and sufficient surety in a form
to be approved by the department. The bond shall be continuous and may be
canceled by the surety upon the surety giving written notice to the director ((of
its intent to cancel the bond)). A cancellation or revocation of the bond
or withdrawal of the surety from the bond automatically suspends the
registration issued to the registrant until a new bond or reinstatement notice
has been filed and approved as provided in this section. The bond shall be
conditioned that the applicant will pay all persons performing labor, including
employee benefits, for the contractor, will pay all taxes and contributions due
to the state of Washington, and will pay all persons furnishing labor or
material or renting or supplying equipment to the contractor and will pay all
amounts that may be adjudged against the contractor by reason of breach of
contract including negligent or improper work in the conduct of the contracting
business. A change in the name of a business or a change in the type of
business entity shall not impair a bond for the purposes of this section so
long as one of the original applicants for such bond maintains partial
ownership in the business covered by the bond.

(2) ((Any contractor
registered as of July 1, 1997, who maintains such registration in accordance
with this chapter shall be in compliance with this chapter until the next
annual renewal of the contractor's certificate of registration. At that time))
At the time of initial registration or renewal, the contractor shall
provide a bond((, cash deposit,)) or other security deposit as required
by this chapter and comply with all of the other provisions of this chapter
before the department shall issue or renew the contractor's certificate
of registration. Any contractor registered as of July 1, 2001, who
maintains that registration in accordance with this chapter is in compliance with
this chapter until the next renewal of the contractor's certificate of
registration.

(3) Any person, firm,
or corporation having a claim against the contractor for any of the items
referred to in this section may bring suit upon the bond or deposit in the
superior court of the county in which the work was done or of any county in
which jurisdiction of the contractor may be had. The surety issuing the bond
shall be named as a party to any suit upon the bond. Action upon the bond or
deposit ((shall be commenced by filing the summons and complaint with the
clerk of the appropriate superior court within one year from the date of
expiration of the certificate of registration in force at the time)) brought
by a residential homeowner for breach of contract by a party to the
construction contract shall be commenced by filing the summons and complaint
with the clerk of the appropriate superior court within one year from the date
the claimed contract work was substantially completed or abandoned. Action
upon the bond or deposit brought by any other authorized party shall be
commenced by filing the summons and complaint with the clerk of the appropriate
superior court within one year from the date the claimed labor was
performed and benefits accrued, taxes and contributions owing the state of
Washington became due, materials and equipment were furnished, or the claimed
contract work was substantially completed or abandoned. Service of
process in an action against the contractor, the contractor's bond, or the
deposit shall be exclusively by service upon the department. Three copies of
the summons and complaint and a fee ((of)) adopted by rule of not
less than ten dollars to cover the ((handling)) costs shall be
served by registered or certified mail, or other delivery service requiring
notice of receipt, upon the department at the time suit is started and the
department shall maintain a record, available for public inspection, of all
suits so commenced. Service is not complete until the department receives the
((ten-dollar)) fee and three copies of the summons and complaint. The
service shall constitute service on the registrant and the surety for suit upon
the bond or deposit and the department shall transmit the summons and complaint
or a copy thereof to the registrant at the address listed in the registrant's
application and to the surety within ((forty-eight hours)) two days
after it shall have been received.

(4) The total amount
paid from a bond or deposit required by this section to claimants other than
residential homeowners must not exceed one-half of the bond amount. The total
amount paid from a bond or deposit required of a specialty contractor by this
section to claimants other than residential homeowners must not exceed
two-thirds of the bond amount.

(5) The surety
upon the bond shall not be liable in an aggregate amount in excess of the
amount named in the bond nor for any monetary penalty assessed pursuant to this
chapter for an infraction. The liability of the surety shall not cumulate
where the bond has been renewed, continued, reinstated, reissued or otherwise
extended. The surety upon the bond may, upon notice to the department and the
parties, tender to the clerk of the court having jurisdiction of the action an
amount equal to the claims thereunder or the amount of the bond less the amount
of judgments, if any, previously satisfied therefrom and to the extent of such
tender the surety upon the bond shall be exonerated but if the actions
commenced and pending at any one time exceed the amount of the bond then
unimpaired, claims shall be satisfied from the bond in the following order:

(a) Employee labor and
claims of laborers, including employee benefits;

(b) Claims for breach
of contract by a party to the construction contract;

(c) Registered or
licensed subcontractors, material, and equipment;

(d) Taxes and
contributions due the state of Washington;

(e) Any court costs,
interest, and attorney's fees plaintiff may be entitled to recover. The surety
is not liable for any amount in excess of the penal limit of its bond.

A payment made by the
surety in good faith exonerates the bond to the extent of any payment made by
the surety.

(((5))) (6)
The prevailing party in an action filed under this section against the
contractor and contractor's bond or deposit, for breach of contract by a party
to a construction contract, is entitled to costs, interest, and reasonable
attorneys' fees. The surety upon the bond is not liable in an aggregate amount
in excess of the amount named in the bond nor for any monetary penalty assessed
pursuant to this chapter for an infraction.

(7) If a final
judgment impairs the liability of the surety upon the bond so furnished that
there ((shall not be)) is not in effect a bond ((undertaking))
in the full amount prescribed in this section, ((the department shall
suspend)) the registration of the contractor is automatically suspended
until the bond liability in the required amount unimpaired by unsatisfied
judgment claims is furnished. ((If the bond becomes fully impaired, a new
bond must be furnished at the rates prescribed by this section.

(6))) (8) In lieu of the surety bond required
by this section the contractor may file with the department a deposit
consisting of cash or other security acceptable to the department.

(((7))) (9)
Any person having filed and served a summons and complaint as required by this
section having an unsatisfied final judgment against the registrant for any
items referred to in this section may execute upon the security held by the
department by serving a certified copy of the unsatisfied final judgment by
registered or certified mail upon the department within one year of the date of
entry of such judgment. Upon the receipt of service of such certified copy the
department shall pay or order paid from the deposit, through the registry of
the superior court which rendered judgment, towards the amount of the
unsatisfied judgment. The priority of payment by the department shall be the
order of receipt by the department, but the department shall have no liability
for payment in excess of the amount of the deposit.

(((8))) (10)
The director may require an applicant applying to renew or reinstate a
registration or applying for a new registration to file a bond of up to three
times the normally required amount, if the director determines that an
applicant, or a previous registration of a corporate officer, owner, or partner
of a current applicant, has had in the past five years two or more unsatisfied
judgments in actions under this chapter involving a residential owner of a
single-family dwelling.

(11) The
director may adopt rules necessary for the proper administration of the
security.

Sec. 4. RCW 18.27.050 and 1987 c
303 s 1 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) At the time of
registration and subsequent reregistration, the applicant shall furnish
insurance or financial responsibility in the form of an assigned account in the
amount of ((twenty)) fifty thousand dollars for injury or damages
to property, and ((fifty)) one hundred thousand dollars for
injury or damage including death to any one person, and ((one)) two
hundred thousand dollars for injury or damage including death to more than one
person ((or financial responsibility to satisfy these amounts)).

(2) ((Failure to
maintain insurance or financial responsibility relative to the contractor's
activities shall be cause to suspend or deny the contractor his or her or their
registration.)) An expiration, cancellation, or revocation of the
insurance policy or withdrawal of the insurer from the insurance policy
automatically suspends the registration issued to the registrant until a new
insurance policy or reinstatement notice has been filed and approved as
provided in this section.

(3)(a) Proof of
financial responsibility authorized in this section may be given by providing,
in the amount required by subsection (1) of this section, an assigned account
acceptable to the department. The assigned account shall be held by the
department to satisfy any execution on a judgment issued against the contractor
for damage to property or injury or death to any person occurring in the
contractor's contracting operations, according to the provisions of the
assigned account agreement. The department shall have no liability for payment
in excess of the amount of the assigned account.

(b) The assigned
account filed with the director as proof of financial responsibility shall be
canceled at the expiration of three years after:

(i) The contractor's
registration has expired or been revoked; or

(ii) The contractor has
furnished proof of insurance as required by subsection (1) of this section;

if, in either case, no
legal action has been instituted against the contractor or on the account at
the expiration of the three-year period.

(c) If a contractor
chooses to file an assigned account as authorized in this section, the
contractor shall, on any contracting project, notify each person with whom the
contractor enters into a contract or to whom the contractor submits a bid that
the contractor has filed an assigned account in lieu of insurance and that
recovery from the account for any claim against the contractor for property
damage or personal injury or death occurring in the project requires the
claimant to obtain a court judgment.

Sec. 5. RCW 18.27.060 and 1997 c
314 s 6 and 1997 c 58 s 817 are each reenacted and amended to read as follows:

(1) A certificate of
registration shall be valid for ((one)) two years and
shall be renewed on or before the expiration date. The department shall issue
to the applicant a certificate of registration upon compliance with the
registration requirements of this chapter.

(2) If the department
approves an application, it shall issue a certificate of registration to the
applicant. ((The certificate shall be valid for:

(a) One year;

(b) Until the bond
expires; or

(c) Until the
insurance expires, whichever comes first. The department shall place the
expiration date on the certificate.

(3) A contractor may
supply a short-term bond or insurance policy to bring its registration period
to the full one year.

(4))) (3) If a contractor's surety bond or
other security has an unsatisfied judgment against it or is canceled, or if the
contractor's insurance policy is canceled, the contractor's registration shall
be automatically suspended on the effective date of the impairment or cancellation.
The department shall mail notice of the suspension to the contractor's address
on the certificate of registration by certified and by first class mail within
((forty-eight hours)) two days after suspension.

(((5))) (4)
Renewal of registration is valid on the date the department receives the
required fee and proof of bond and liability insurance, if sent by certified
mail or other means requiring proof of delivery. The receipt or proof of
delivery shall serve as the contractor's proof of renewed registration until he
or she receives verification from the department.

(((6))) (5)
The department shall immediately suspend the certificate of registration of a
contractor who has been certified by the department of social and health
services as a person who is not in compliance with a support order or a
residential or visitation order as provided in RCW 74.20A.320. The certificate
of registration shall not be reissued or renewed unless the person provides to
the department a release from the department of social and health services
stating that he or she is in compliance with the order and the person has
continued to meet all other requirements for certification during the
suspension.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
6. A new section is added
to chapter 18.27 RCW to read as follows:

(1) If an unregistered
contractor defaults in a payment, penalty, or fine due to the department, the
director or the director's designee may issue a notice of assessment certifying
the amount due. The notice must be served upon the unregistered contractor by
mailing the notice to the unregistered contractor by certified mail to the
unregistered contractor's last known address or served in the manner prescribed
for the service of a summons in a civil action.

(2) A notice of
assessment becomes final thirty days from the date the notice was served upon
the unregistered contractor unless a written request for reconsideration is
filed with the department or an appeal is filed in a court of competent
jurisdiction in the manner specified in RCW 34.05.510 through 34.05.598. The
request for reconsideration must set forth with particularity the reason for
the unregistered contractor's request. The department, within thirty days
after receiving a written request for reconsideration, may modify or reverse a
notice of assessment, or may hold a notice of assessment in abeyance pending
further investigation. If a final decision of a court in favor of the
department is not appealed within the time allowed by law, then the amount of
the unappealed assessment, or such amount of the assessment as is found due by
the final decision of the court, is final.

(3) The director or the
director's designee may file with the clerk of any county within the state, a
warrant in the amount of the notice of assessment, plus interest, penalties,
and a filing fee of twenty dollars. The clerk of the county in which the
warrant is filed shall immediately designate a superior court cause number for
the warrant, and the clerk shall cause to be entered in the judgment docket
under the superior court cause number assigned to the warrant, the name of the
unregistered contractor mentioned in the warrant, the amount of payment,
penalty, fine due on it, or filing fee, and the date when the warrant was
filed. The aggregate amount of the warrant as docketed shall become a lien
upon the title to, and interest in, all real and personal property of the
unregistered contractor against whom the warrant is issued, the same as a judgment
in a civil case docketed in the office of the clerk. The sheriff shall proceed
upon the warrant in all respects and with like effect as prescribed by law with
respect to execution or other process issued against rights or property upon
judgment in a court of competent jurisdiction. The warrant so docketed is
sufficient to support the issuance of writs of garnishment in favor of the
state in a manner provided by law in case of judgment, wholly or partially
unsatisfied. The clerk of the court is entitled to a filing fee which will be
added to the amount of the warrant. A copy of the warrant shall be mailed to
the unregistered contractor within three days of filing with the clerk.

(4) The director or the
director's designee may issue to any person, firm, corporation, other entity,
municipal corporation, political subdivision of the state, a public
corporation, or any agency of the state, a notice and order to withhold and
deliver property of any kind whatsoever when he or she has reason to believe
that there is in the possession of the person, firm, corporation, other entity,
municipal corporation, political subdivision of the state, public corporation,
or agency of the state, property that is or will become due, owing, or
belonging to an unregistered contractor upon whom a notice of assessment has
been served by the department for payments, penalties, or fines due to the
department. The effect of a notice and order is continuous from the date the
notice and order is first made until the liability out of which the notice and
order arose is satisfied or becomes unenforceable because of lapse of time.
The department shall release the notice and order when the liability out of
which the notice and order arose is satisfied or becomes unenforceable by
reason of lapse of time and shall notify the person against whom the notice and
order was made that the notice and order has been released.

The notice and order to
withhold and deliver must be served by the sheriff of the county or by the
sheriff's deputy, by certified mail, return receipt requested, or by an
authorized representative of the director. A person, firm, corporation, other
entity, municipal corporation, political subdivision of the state, public
corporation, or agency of the state upon whom service has been made shall
answer the notice within twenty days exclusive of the day of service, under
oath and in writing, and shall make true answers to the matters inquired of in
the notice and order. Upon service of the notice and order, if the party
served possesses any property that may be subject to the claim of the
department, the party shall promptly deliver the property to the director or
the director's authorized representative. The director shall hold the property
in trust for application on the unregistered contractor's indebtedness to the
department, or for return without interest, in accordance with a final
determination of a petition for review. In the alternative, the party shall
furnish a good and sufficient surety bond satisfactory to the director
conditioned upon final determination of liability. If a party served and named
in the notice fails to answer the notice within the time prescribed in this
section, the court may render judgment by default against the party for the
full amount claimed by the director in the notice, together with costs. If a
notice is served upon an unregistered contractor and the property subject to it
is wages, the unregistered contractor may assert in the answer all exemptions
provided for by chapter 6.27 RCW to which the wage earner is entitled.

(5) In addition to the
procedure for collection of a payment, penalty, or fine due to the department
as set forth in this section, the department may recover civil penalties
imposed under this chapter in a civil action in the name of the department
brought in a court of competent jurisdiction of the county where the violation
is alleged to have occurred.

Sec. 7. RCW 18.27.090 and 1997 c
314 s 8 are each amended to read as follows:

The registration
provisions of this chapter ((does)) do not apply to:

(1) An authorized
representative of the United States government, the state of Washington, or any
incorporated city, town, county, township, irrigation district, reclamation
district, or other municipal or political corporation or subdivision of this
state;

(2) Officers of a court
when they are acting within the scope of their office;

(3) Public utilities
operating under the regulations of the utilities and transportation commission
in construction, maintenance, or development work incidental to their own
business;

(4) Any construction,
repair, or operation incidental to the discovering or producing of petroleum or
gas, or the drilling, testing, abandoning, or other operation of any petroleum
or gas well or any surface or underground mine or mineral deposit when
performed by an owner or lessee;

(5) The sale or
installation of any finished products, materials, or articles of merchandise ((which))
that are not actually fabricated into and do not become a permanent
fixed part of a structure;

(6) Any construction,
alteration, improvement, or repair of personal property((, except this
chapter shall apply to all mobile/manufactured housing. A mobile/manufactured
home may be installed, set up, or repaired by the registered or legal owner, by
a contractor registered under this chapter)) performed by the registered
or legal owner, or by a mobile/manufactured home retail dealer or
manufacturer licensed under chapter 46.70 RCW who shall warranty service and
repairs under chapter 46.70 RCW;

(7) Any construction,
alteration, improvement, or repair carried on within the limits and boundaries
of any site or reservation under the legal jurisdiction of the federal
government;

(8) Any person who only
furnished materials, supplies, or equipment without fabricating them into, or
consuming them in the performance of, the work of the contractor;

(9) Any work or
operation on one undertaking or project by one or more contracts, the aggregate
contract price of which for labor and materials and all other items is less
than five hundred dollars, such work or operations being considered as of a casual,
minor, or inconsequential nature. The exemption prescribed in this subsection
does not apply in any instance wherein the work or construction is only a part
of a larger or major operation, whether undertaken by the same or a different
contractor, or in which a division of the operation is made into contracts of
amounts less than five hundred dollars for the purpose of evasion of this
chapter or otherwise. The exemption prescribed in this subsection does not
apply to a person who advertises or puts out any sign or card or other device
which might indicate to the public that he or she is a contractor, or that he
or she is qualified to engage in the business of contractor;

(10) Any construction
or operation incidental to the construction and repair of irrigation and
drainage ditches of regularly constituted irrigation districts or reclamation
districts; or to farming, dairying, agriculture, viticulture, horticulture, or
stock or poultry raising; or to clearing or other work upon land in rural
districts for fire prevention purposes; except when any of the above work is
performed by a registered contractor;

(11) An owner who
contracts for a project with a registered contractor;

(12) Any person working
on his or her own property, whether occupied by him or her or not, and any
person working on his or her personal residence, whether owned by him or her or
not but this exemption shall not apply to any person otherwise covered by this
chapter who constructs an improvement on his or her own property with the intention
and for the purpose of selling the improved property;

(13) Owners of
commercial properties who use their own employees to do maintenance, repair,
and alteration work in or upon their own properties;

(14) A licensed
architect or civil or professional engineer acting solely in his or her
professional capacity, an electrician licensed under the laws of the state of
Washington, or a plumber licensed under the laws of the state of Washington or
licensed by a political subdivision of the state of Washington while operating
within the boundaries of such political subdivision. The exemption provided in
this subsection is applicable only when the licensee is operating within the
scope of his or her license;

(15) Any person who
engages in the activities herein regulated as an employee of a registered
contractor with wages as his or her sole compensation or as an employee with
wages as his or her sole compensation;

(16) Contractors on
highway projects who have been prequalified as required by RCW 47.28.070, with
the department of transportation to perform highway construction,
reconstruction, or maintenance work;

(17) A
mobile/manufactured home dealer or manufacturer who subcontracts the
installation, set-up, or repair work to actively registered contractors. This
exemption only applies to the installation, set-up, or repair of the
mobile/manufactured homes that were manufactured or sold by the
mobile/manufactured home dealer or manufacturer.

Sec. 8. RCW 18.27.100 and 1997 c
314 s 9 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) Except as provided
in RCW 18.27.065 for partnerships and joint ventures, no person who has
registered under one name as provided in this chapter shall engage in the
business, or act in the capacity, of a contractor under any other name unless
such name also is registered under this chapter.

(2) All advertising and
all contracts, correspondence, cards, signs, posters, papers, and documents
which show a contractor's name or address shall show the contractor's name or
address as registered under this chapter.

(3)(a) All advertising
that shows the contractor's name or address shall show the contractor's current
registration number. The registration number may be omitted in an alphabetized
listing of registered contractors stating only the name, address, and telephone
number: PROVIDED, That signs on motor vehicles subject to RCW 46.16.010 and
on-premise signs shall not constitute advertising as provided in this section.
All materials used to directly solicit business from retail customers who are
not businesses shall show the contractor's current registration number. A
contractor shall not use a false or expired registration number in purchasing
or offering to purchase an advertisement for which a contractor registration
number is required. Advertising by airwave transmission shall not be subject
to this subsection (3)(a).

(b) The director may
issue a subpoena to any person or entity selling any advertising subject to
this section for the name, address, and telephone number provided to the seller
of the advertising by the purchaser of the advertising. The subpoena must have
enclosed a stamped, self-addressed envelope and blank form to be filled out by
the seller of the advertising. If the seller of the advertising has the
information on file, the seller shall, within a reasonable time, return the
completed form to the department. The subpoena must be issued ((before
forty-eight hours)) no more than two days after the expiration of
the issue or publication containing the advertising or after the broadcast of
the advertising. The good-faith compliance by a seller of advertising with a
written request of the department for information concerning the purchaser of
advertising shall constitute a complete defense to any civil or criminal action
brought against the seller of advertising arising from such compliance.
Advertising by airwave or electronic transmission is subject to this subsection
(3)(b).

(4) No contractor shall
advertise that he or she is bonded and insured because of the bond required to
be filed and sufficiency of insurance as provided in this chapter.

(5) A contractor shall
not falsify a registration number and use it, or use an expired registration
number, in connection with any solicitation or identification as a contractor.
All individual contractors and all partners, associates, agents, salesmen,
solicitors, officers, and employees of contractors shall use their true names
and addresses at all times while engaged in the business or capacity of a
contractor or activities related thereto.

(6) Any advertising by
a person, firm, or corporation soliciting work as a contractor when that
person, firm, or corporation is not registered pursuant to this chapter is a
violation of this chapter.

(7)(a) The finding of a
violation of this section by the director at a hearing held in accordance with
the Administrative Procedure Act, chapter 34.05 RCW, shall subject the person
committing the violation to a penalty of not more than ((five)) ten
thousand dollars as determined by the director.

(b) Penalties under
this section shall not apply to a violation determined to be an inadvertent
error.

Sec. 9. RCW 18.27.110 and 1997 c
314 s 11 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) No city, town or
county shall issue a construction building permit for work which is to be done
by any contractor required to be registered under this chapter without
verification that such contractor is currently registered as required by law.
When such verification is made, nothing contained in this section is intended
to be, nor shall be construed to create, or form the basis for any liability
under this chapter on the part of any city, town or county, or its officers,
employees or agents. However, failure to verify the contractor registration
number results in liability to the city, town, or county to a penalty to be
imposed according to RCW 18.27.100(((7))) (6)(a).

(2) At the time of
issuing the building permit, all cities, towns, or counties are responsible
for:

(a) Printing the
contractor registration number on the building permit; and

(b) Providing a written
notice to the building permit applicant informing them of contractor
registration laws and the potential risk and monetary liability to the
homeowner for using an unregistered contractor.

(3) If a building
permit is obtained by an applicant or contractor who falsifies information to
obtain an exemption provided under RCW 18.27.090, the building permit shall be
forfeited.

Sec. 10. RCW 18.27.114 and 1997 c
314 s 12 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) Any contractor
agreeing to perform any contracting project: (a) For the repair, alteration,
or construction of four or fewer residential units or accessory structures on
such residential property when the bid or contract price totals one thousand dollars
or more; or (b) for the repair, alteration, or construction of a commercial
building when the bid or contract price totals one thousand dollars or more but
less than sixty thousand dollars, must provide the customer with the following
disclosure statement in substantially the following form using lower case
and upper case twelve-point and bold type where appropriate, prior to
starting work on the project:

"NOTICE
TO CUSTOMER

((This
contractor is registered with the state of Washington, registration no.
. . . ., as a general/specialty contractor and has posted with
the state a bond or cash deposit of $6,000/$4,000 for the purpose of satisfying
claims against the contractor for negligent or improper work or breach of
contract in the conduct of the contractor's business. The expiration date of
this contractor's registration is . . . . . . This
bond or cash deposit may not be sufficient to cover a claim which might arise
from the work done under your contract. If any supplier of materials used in
your construction project or any employee of the contractor or subcontractor is
not paid by the contractor or subcontractor on your job, your property may be
liened to force payment. If you wish additional protection, you may request
the contractor to provide you with original "lien release" documents
from each supplier or subcontractor on your project. The contractor is
required to provide you with further information about lien release documents
if you request it. General information is also available from the department
of labor and industries."))

This
contractor is registered with the state of Washington, registration no.
. . ., and has posted with the state a bond or deposit of
. . . . . for the purpose of satisfying claims against the
contractor for breach of contract including negligent or improper work in the
conduct of the contractor's business. The expiration date of this contractor's
registration is . . . . ..

THIS BOND OR DEPOSIT MIGHT NOT BE SUFFICIENT TO COVER A CLAIM THAT
MIGHT ARISE FROM THE WORK DONE UNDER YOUR CONTRACT.

This
bond or deposit is not for your exclusive use because it covers all work
performed by this contractor. The bond or deposit is intended to pay valid
claims up to . . . . . that you and other customers,
suppliers, subcontractors, or taxing authorities may have.

FOR GREATER PROTECTION YOU MAY WITHHOLD A PERCENTAGE OF YOUR CONTRACT.

You
may withhold a contractually defined percentage of your construction contract
as retainage for a stated period of time to provide protection to you and help
insure that your project will be completed as required by your contract.

YOUR PROPERTY MAY BE LIENED.

If
a supplier of materials used in your construction project or an employee or
subcontractor of your contractor or subcontractors is not paid, your property
may be liened to force payment and you could pay twice for the same work.

FOR ADDITIONAL PROTECTION, YOU MAY REQUEST THE CONTRACTOR TO PROVIDE
YOU WITH ORIGINAL "LIEN RELEASE" DOCUMENTS FROM EACH SUPPLIER OR
SUBCONTRACTOR ON YOUR PROJECT.

The
contractor is required to provide you with further information about lien
release documents if you request it. General information is also available
from the state Department of Labor and Industries."

(2) A contractor
subject to this section shall notify any consumer to whom notice is required
under subsection (1) of this section if the contractor's registration has
expired or is revoked or suspended by the department prior to completion or
other termination of the contract with the consumer.

(3) No contractor
subject to this section may bring or maintain any lien claim under chapter
60.04 RCW based on any contract to which this section applies without alleging
and proving that the contractor has provided the customer with a copy of the
disclosure statement as required in subsection (1) of this section.

(4) This section does
not apply to contracts authorized under chapter 39.04 RCW or to contractors
contracting with other contractors.

(5) Failure to comply
with this section shall constitute an infraction under the provisions of this
chapter.

(6) The department
shall produce model disclosure statements, and public service announcements
detailing the information needed to assist contractors and contractors'
customers to comply under this section. As necessary, the department shall
periodically update these education materials.

Sec. 11. RCW 60.04.031 and 1992 c
126 s 2 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) Except as otherwise
provided in this section, every person furnishing professional services,
materials, or equipment for the improvement of real property shall give the
owner or reputed owner notice in writing of the right to claim a lien. If the
prime contractor is in compliance with the requirements of RCW 19.27.095,
60.04.230, and 60.04.261, this notice shall also be given to the prime
contractor as described in this subsection unless the potential lien claimant
has contracted directly with the prime contractor. The notice may be given at
any time but only protects the right to claim a lien for professional services,
materials, or equipment supplied after the date which is sixty days before:

(a) Mailing the notice
by certified or registered mail to the owner or reputed owner; or

(b) Delivering or
serving the notice personally upon the owner or reputed owner and obtaining
evidence of delivery in the form of a receipt or other ((acknowledgement))
acknowledgment signed by the owner or reputed owner or an affidavit of
service.

In the case of new
construction of a single-family residence, the notice of a right to claim a
lien may be given at any time but only protects the right to claim a lien for
professional services, materials, or equipment supplied after ((a)) the
date ((which is ten days before)) the notice is given as described in
this subsection.

(2) Notices of a right
to claim a lien shall not be required of:

(a) Persons who
contract directly with the owner or the owner's common law agent;

(b) Laborers whose
claim of lien is based solely on performing labor; or

(c) Subcontractors who
contract for the improvement of real property directly with the prime
contractor, except as provided in subsection (3)(b) of this section.

(3) Persons who furnish
professional services, materials, or equipment in connection with the repair,
alteration, or remodel of an existing owner-occupied single-family residence or
appurtenant garage or in connection with the new construction of a
single-family residence for a residential homeowner:

(a) Who contract
directly with the ((owner-occupier)) owner or ((their)) the
owner's common law agent shall not be required to send a written notice of
the right to claim a lien and shall have a lien for the full amount due under
their contract, as provided in RCW 60.04.021; or

(b) Who do not contract
directly with the ((owner-occupier)) owner or ((their)) the
owner's common law agent shall give notice of the right to claim a lien to
the ((owner-occupier)) owner. Liens of persons furnishing
professional services, materials, or equipment who do not contract directly
with the ((owner-occupier)) owner or ((their)) the
owner's common law agent may only be satisfied from amounts not yet paid to
the prime contractor by the owner at the time the notice described in this
section is received, regardless of whether amounts not yet paid to the prime
contractor are due, and these liens may not be satisfied if the owner or the
owner's common law agent has paid the contractor, prior to receipt of the lien
notice, for the services or supplies for which the lien is claimed. For
the purposes of this subsection "received" means actual receipt of
notice by personal service, or registered or certified mail, or three days
after mailing by registered or certified mail, excluding Saturdays, Sundays, or
legal holidays.

(4) The notice of right
to claim a lien described in subsection (1) of this section, shall include but
not be limited to the following information and shall substantially be in the
following form, using lower-case and upper-case ten-point type where
appropriate.

NOTICE
TO OWNER

IMPORTANT:
READ BOTH SIDES OF THIS NOTICE

CAREFULLY.

PROTECT
YOURSELF FROM PAYING TWICE

To: ............. Date:..........................

Re: (description
of property: Street address or general location.)

From: ..........................................................

AT THE REQUEST OF: (Name of person ordering the
professional services, materials, or equipment)

THIS IS NOT A LIEN‑-THIS
NOTICE IS MEANT TO PROVIDE YOU WITH INFORMATION NECESSARY TO PROPERLY MANAGE
YOUR CONSTRUCTION PROJECT: This notice is sent to you to tell you who is
providing professional services, materials, or equipment for the improvement of
your property and to advise you of the rights of these persons and your
responsibilities. Also take note that laborers on your project may claim a
lien without sending you a notice.

OWNER/OCCUPIER
OF EXISTING

RESIDENTIAL
PROPERTY AND/OR

NEW
RESIDENTIAL PROPERTY

Under Washington law, those
who furnish labor, professional services, materials, or equipment for the
repair, remodel, or alteration of your owner-occupied principal residence and
who are not paid, have a right to enforce their claim for payment against your
property. This claim is known as a construction lien.

The law limits the amount
that a lien claimant can claim against your property. If the improvement to
your property is the construction of a new single-family residence, a lien may
be claimed for all professional services, materials, or equipment furnished
after the date this notice was given to you or mailed to you. Claims may
only be made against that portion of the contract price you have not yet paid
to your prime contractor as of the time this notice was given to you or three
days after this notice was mailed to you. Review the back of this notice for
more information and ways to avoid lien claims.

COMMERCIAL
((AND/OR NEW

RESIDENTIAL)) PROPERTY

We have or will be
providing professional services, materials, or equipment for the improvement of
your commercial ((or new residential)) project. In the event you or
your contractor fail to pay us, we may file a lien against your property. A
lien may be claimed for all professional services, materials, or equipment
furnished after a date that is sixty days before this notice was given to you
or mailed to you((, unless the improvement to your property is the
construction of a new single-family residence, then ten days before this notice
was given to you or mailed to you)).

Sender: ....................................................

Address: ...................................................

Telephone: .................................................

Brief description of
professional services, materials, or equipment provided or to be provided: ....................................

IMPORTANT
INFORMATION

ON
REVERSE SIDE

IMPORTANT
INFORMATION

FOR
YOUR PROTECTION

This notice is sent to
inform you that we have or will provide professional services, materials, or
equipment for the improvement of your property. We expect to be paid by the
person who ordered our services, but if we are not paid, we have the right to
enforce our claim by filing a construction lien against your property.

LEARN more about the lien
laws and the meaning of this notice by discussing them with your contractor,
suppliers, Department of Labor and Industries, the firm sending you this
notice, your lender, or your attorney.

COMMON METHODS TO AVOID
CONSTRUCTION LIENS: There are several methods available to protect your
property from construction liens. The following are two of the more commonly
used methods.

DUAL
PAYCHECKS (Joint Checks): When paying your contractor for services or
materials, you may make checks payable jointly to the contractor and the firms
furnishing you this notice.

LIEN
RELEASES: You may require your contractor to provide lien releases signed by
all the suppliers and subcontractors from whom you have received this notice.
If they cannot obtain lien releases because you have not paid them, you may use
the dual payee check method to protect yourself.

YOU SHOULD TAKE APPROPRIATE
STEPS TO PROTECT YOUR PROPERTY FROM LIENS.

YOUR PRIME CONTRACTOR AND
YOUR CONSTRUCTION LENDER ARE REQUIRED BY LAW TO GIVE YOU WRITTEN INFORMATION
ABOUT LIEN CLAIMS. IF YOU HAVE NOT RECEIVED IT, ASK THEM FOR IT.

* * *
* * * * * * * * * *

(5) Every potential
lien claimant providing professional services where no improvement as defined
in RCW 60.04.011(5) (a) or (b) has been commenced, and the professional
services provided are not visible from an inspection of the real property may
record in the real property records of the county where the property is located
a notice which shall contain the professional service provider's name, address,
telephone number, legal description of the property, the owner or reputed
owner's name, and the general nature of the professional services provided. If
such notice is not recorded, the lien claimed shall be subordinate to the
interest of any subsequent mortgagee and invalid as to the interest of any
subsequent purchaser if the mortgagee or purchaser acts in good faith and for a
valuable consideration acquires an interest in the property prior to the
commencement of an improvement as defined in RCW 60.04.011(5) (a) or (b)
without notice of the professional services being provided. The notice
described in this subsection shall be substantially in the following form:

NOTICE
OF FURNISHING

PROFESSIONAL
SERVICES

That on the (day) day of (month and
year) , (name of
provider) began providing professional services upon or
for the improvement of real property legally described as follows:

[Legal
Description

is
mandatory]

The general nature of
the professional services provided is..

.................................................................

The owner or reputed owner
of the real property is...............

.................................................................

...................................

(Signature)

...................................

(Name
of Claimant)

...................................

(Street
Address)

...................................

(City,
State, Zip Code)

...................................

(Phone
Number)

(6) A lien authorized
by this chapter shall not be enforced unless the lien claimant has complied
with the applicable provisions of this section.

(7) For the purposes
of this section "commercial property" includes residential property
that is not owned by a residential homeowner.

Sec. 12. RCW 18.27.310 and 1993 c
454 s 10 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) The administrative
law judge shall conduct contractors' notice of infraction cases pursuant to
chapter 34.05 RCW.

(2) The burden of proof
is on the department to establish the commission of the infraction by a
preponderance of the evidence. The notice of infraction shall be dismissed if
the defendant establishes that, at the time the ((notice was issued)) work
was performed, the defendant was registered by the department, without
suspension, or was exempt from registration.

(3) After consideration
of the evidence and argument, the administrative law judge shall determine
whether the infraction was committed. If it has not been established that the
infraction was committed, an order dismissing the notice shall be entered in
the record of the proceedings. If it has been established that the infraction
was committed, the administrative law judge shall issue findings of fact and
conclusions of law in its decision and order determining whether the infraction
was committed.

(4) An appeal from the
administrative law judge's determination or order shall be to the superior
court. The decision of the superior court is subject only to discretionary
review pursuant to Rule 2.3 of the Rules of Appellate Procedure.

Sec. 13. RCW 18.27.320 and 1993 c
454 s 11 are each amended to read as follows:

The administrative law
judge shall dismiss the notice of infraction at any time upon written
notification from the department that the contractor named in the notice of
infraction was registered, without suspension, at the time the ((notice of
infraction was issued)) work was performed.

Sec. 14. RCW 18.27.340 and 1997 c
314 s 17 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) Except as otherwise
provided in subsection (3) of this section, a contractor found to have
committed an infraction under RCW 18.27.200 shall be assessed a monetary
penalty of not less than two hundred dollars and not more than five thousand
dollars.

(2) The director may
waive collection in favor of payment of restitution to a consumer complainant.

(3) A contractor found
to have committed an infraction under RCW 18.27.200 for failure to register
shall be assessed a fine of not less than one thousand dollars, nor more than
five thousand dollars. The director may reduce the penalty for failure to
register, but in no case below five hundred dollars, if the person becomes
registered within ten days of receiving a notice of infraction and the notice
of infraction is for a first offense.

(((4) Monetary penalties
collected under this chapter shall be deposited in the general fund.))

NEW SECTION. Sec.
15. A new section is added
to chapter 18.27 RCW to read as follows:

The department shall:

(1) Increase consumer
awareness of the requirements of this chapter and the methods available to
consumers to protect themselves against loss;

(2) Increase contractor
awareness of the obligations imposed on contractors by this chapter;

(3) Use reasonable
means to increase awareness, including but not limited to offering voluntary
workshops, distributing brochures, and operating consumer and contractor
internet and phone hotlines;

(4) Distribute model
construction contracts and make them available to consumers and contractors;
and

(5) Arrange for the
airing of public service announcements on radio and television regarding
consumer and contractor education services offered by the department.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
16. A new section is added
to chapter 18.27 RCW to read as follows:

The contractor
registration account is created in the state treasury. All receipts from
registration, penalties, and other sources under this chapter must be deposited
into the account. Moneys in the account may be spent only after
appropriation. Expenditures from the account may be used only for the
administration and enforcement of this chapter and to provide consumer
education on issues related to this chapter and contractor education on
contractor obligations under this chapter.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
17. A new section is added
to chapter 18.27 RCW to read as follows:

(1) The legislature
finds that unregistered contractors in Washington state harm the public, their
workers, and contractors who have registered, and that it is contrary to public
policy to allow unregistered contractors to continue doing business illegally.
Unregistered contractors commonly fail to: Pay taxes which results in state
taxpayers having to subsidize their illegal business activities; protect their
workers with workers' compensation insurance; comply with worker safety and
health laws; cover their workers with unemployment compensation; and comply
with many other state laws and requirements. The legislature also finds that
past coordinated efforts by agencies to identify unregistered contractors have
demonstrated their effectiveness but have not been continued. It is the
intention of the legislature that the department of labor and industries, the
employment security department, and the department of revenue actively engage
in cooperative enforcement efforts to reduce the number of unregistered
contractors.

(2) The department of
labor and industries, the employment security department, and the department of
revenue shall establish an unregistered contractors enforcement team. The team
shall develop a written plan to coordinate the activities of the participating
agencies to enforce the state's contractor registration laws and rules,
workers' compensation laws and rules, unemployment compensation laws and rules,
sales tax laws and rules, excise tax laws and rules, as well as any other state
laws and rules deemed appropriate by the team. In developing the plan, the
team shall seek the input and advice of interested stakeholders who support the
work of the team. The plan shall set out mechanisms to:

(a) Identify
unregistered contractors doing business in Washington state; cite unregistered
contractors for any violations of this chapter and other business and employer
requirements; and apply the appropriate sanctions;

(b) Refer unregistered
contractors for audit and assessment for all unpaid taxes, workers'
compensation premiums, state unemployment contributions, and associated interest
and penalties; and

(c) Ensure that
unregistered contractors either cease doing business or make a good faith
effort to comply with the laws of the state of Washington for those doing
construction contracting.

The team's plan shall
include provisions to minimize the time and costs imposed on registered
contractors in determining if they are properly registered under this chapter.

The team shall also
develop annual reports to the legislature on unregistered contractor
enforcement activities and, by January 1st of each year, forward those reports
in writing to the appropriate standing committees of the legislature and to the
departments that contribute members to the team.

(3) By September 1,
2001, the director or the director's designee shall call the initial meeting of
the unregistered contractors enforcement team. The team shall complete its
first plan by December 1, 2001, and begin implementation by January 1, 2002.
The team may make revisions to its plan as the team deems necessary to assure
the maximum effectiveness of the team's efforts.

(4) The team shall, on
a quarterly basis, aggregate data on its efforts. The data shall include but
not be limited to: The number of contractors contacted as a part of
implementing the team's plan; the number of citations or other actions taken
against contractors for violations of this chapter or other laws or
regulations; and the number of contractors referred for audit. For each set of
numbers the team shall specify whether the contractors were registered or
unregistered. The team shall make the quarterly data available to interested
parties who request to receive the updates.

(5) The director shall
provide the necessary administrative support for the team's meetings and
activities.

(6) This section expires
July 1, 2005.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
18. A new section is added
to chapter 82.01 RCW to read as follows:

The director shall
designate at least one individual from the department who has experience in
identifying unregistered businesses and assessing such businesses for unpaid
taxes to participate in the unregistered contractors enforcement team
established in section 17 of this act. The director shall, each fiscal year,
allocate a minimum of one-half full-time employees and necessary support from
the department's budget to implement the plan of the team to identify
unregistered contractors, impose appropriate sanctions for violations of this
chapter, and refer them for appropriate audits and assessments.

This section expires July
1, 2005.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
19. A new section is added
to chapter 50.08 RCW to read as follows:

The commissioner shall
designate at least one individual from the employment security department who
has experience in identifying businesses that fail to meet their unemployment
compensation contribution requirements and assessing such businesses for unpaid
contributions to participate on the unregistered contractors enforcement team
established in section 17 of this act. The commissioner shall, each fiscal
year, allocate a minimum of one-half full-time employees and necessary support
from the employment security department's budget to implement the plan of the
team to identify unregistered contractors, impose appropriate sanctions for
violations of this chapter, and refer them for appropriate audits and
assessments.

This section expires
July 1, 2005.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
20. A new section is added
to chapter 43.22 RCW to read as follows:

The director of labor and
industries shall designate at least one individual from the department of labor
and industries' programs to enforce chapter 18.27 RCW who has experience in
identifying unregistered contractors and enforcing the requirements of this
chapter on such individuals, and at least one individual from the department's
programs to implement Title 51 RCW who has experience in identifying businesses
that fail to meet their state industrial insurance contribution requirements
and assessing such businesses for unpaid premiums to participate on the
unregistered contractors enforcement team established in section 17 of this
act. The director of labor and industries shall, each fiscal year, allocate a
minimum of one-half full-time employees and necessary support from the
department of labor and industries' budget from each division to implement the
plan of the team to identify unregistered contractors and refer them for audit
and assessment. The director shall authorize individuals from any agency who
are implementing the team's plan to issue violations and citations authorized
by this act for failing to be a registered contractor.

This section expires
July 1, 2005.

Sec. 21. RCW 43.84.092 and 2000
2nd sp.s. c 4 s 5 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) All earnings of
investments of surplus balances in the state treasury shall be deposited to the
treasury income account, which account is hereby established in the state
treasury.

(2) The treasury income
account shall be utilized to pay or receive funds associated with federal
programs as required by the federal cash management improvement act of 1990.
The treasury income account is subject in all respects to chapter 43.88 RCW,
but no appropriation is required for refunds or allocations of interest
earnings required by the cash management improvement act. Refunds of interest
to the federal treasury required under the cash management improvement act fall
under RCW 43.88.180 and shall not require appropriation. The office of
financial management shall determine the amounts due to or from the federal
government pursuant to the cash management improvement act. The office of
financial management may direct transfers of funds between accounts as deemed
necessary to implement the provisions of the cash management improvement act,
and this subsection. Refunds or allocations shall occur prior to the
distributions of earnings set forth in subsection (4) of this section.

(3) Except for the
provisions of RCW 43.84.160, the treasury income account may be utilized for
the payment of purchased banking services on behalf of treasury funds
including, but not limited to, depository, safekeeping, and disbursement
functions for the state treasury and affected state agencies. The treasury
income account is subject in all respects to chapter 43.88 RCW, but no
appropriation is required for payments to financial institutions. Payments
shall occur prior to distribution of earnings set forth in subsection (4) of
this section.

(4) Monthly, the state
treasurer shall distribute the earnings credited to the treasury income
account. The state treasurer shall credit the general fund with all the
earnings credited to the treasury income account except:

(a) The following
accounts and funds shall receive their proportionate share of earnings based
upon each account's and fund's average daily balance for the period: The
capitol building construction account, the Cedar River channel construction and
operation account, the Central Washington University capital projects account,
the charitable, educational, penal and reformatory institutions account, the
common school construction fund, the contractor registration account,
the county criminal justice assistance account, the county sales and use tax
equalization account, the data processing building construction account, the
deferred compensation administrative account, the deferred compensation
principal account, the department of retirement systems expense account, the
drinking water assistance account, the Eastern Washington University capital
projects account, the education construction fund, the emergency reserve fund,
the federal forest revolving account, the health services account, the public
health services account, the health system capacity account, the personal health
services account, the state higher education construction account, the higher
education construction account, the highway infrastructure account, the
industrial insurance premium refund account, the judges' retirement account,
the judicial retirement administrative account, the judicial retirement
principal account, the local leasehold excise tax account, the local real
estate excise tax account, the local sales and use tax account, the medical aid
account, the mobile home park relocation fund, the multimodal transportation
account, the municipal criminal justice assistance account, the municipal sales
and use tax equalization account, the natural resources deposit account, the
perpetual surveillance and maintenance account, the public employees' retirement
system plan 1 account, the public employees' retirement system plan 2 account,
the Puyallup tribal settlement account, the resource management cost account,
the site closure account, the special wildlife account, the state employees'
insurance account, the state employees' insurance reserve account, the state
investment board expense account, the state investment board commingled trust
fund accounts, the supplemental pension account, the teachers' retirement
system plan 1 account, the teachers' retirement system combined plan 2 and plan
3 account, the tobacco prevention and control account, the tobacco settlement
account, the transportation infrastructure account, the tuition recovery trust
fund, the University of Washington bond retirement fund, the University of
Washington building account, the volunteer fire fighters' and reserve officers'
relief and pension principal fund, the volunteer fire fighters' and reserve
officers' administrative fund, the Washington judicial retirement system
account, the Washington law enforcement officers' and fire fighters' system
plan 1 retirement account, the Washington law enforcement officers' and fire
fighters' system plan 2 retirement account, the Washington school employees'
retirement system combined plan 2 and 3 account, the Washington state health
insurance pool account, the Washington state patrol retirement account, the
Washington State University building account, the Washington State University
bond retirement fund, the water pollution control revolving fund, and the
Western Washington University capital projects account. Earnings derived from
investing balances of the agricultural permanent fund, the normal school
permanent fund, the permanent common school fund, the scientific permanent
fund, and the state university permanent fund shall be allocated to their
respective beneficiary accounts. All earnings to be distributed under this
subsection (4)(a) shall first be reduced by the allocation to the state
treasurer's service fund pursuant to RCW 43.08.190.

(b) The following
accounts and funds shall receive eighty percent of their proportionate share of
earnings based upon each account's or fund's average daily balance for the
period: The aeronautics account, the aircraft search and rescue account, the
county arterial preservation account, the department of licensing services
account, the essential rail assistance account, the ferry bond retirement fund,
the grade crossing protective fund, the high capacity transportation account,
the highway bond retirement fund, the highway safety account, the motor vehicle
fund, the motorcycle safety education account, the pilotage account, the public
transportation systems account, the Puget Sound capital construction account,
the Puget Sound ferry operations account, the recreational vehicle account, the
rural arterial trust account, the safety and education account, the special
category C account, the state patrol highway account, the transportation
equipment fund, the transportation fund, the transportation improvement account,
the transportation improvement board bond retirement account, and the urban
arterial trust account.

(5) In conformance with
Article II, section 37 of the state Constitution, no treasury accounts or funds
shall be allocated earnings without the specific affirmative directive of this
section.

Sec. 22. RCW 43.84.092 and 2000
2nd sp.s. c 4 s 6 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) All earnings of
investments of surplus balances in the state treasury shall be deposited to the
treasury income account, which account is hereby established in the state
treasury.

(2) The treasury income
account shall be utilized to pay or receive funds associated with federal
programs as required by the federal cash management improvement act of 1990.
The treasury income account is subject in all respects to chapter 43.88 RCW,
but no appropriation is required for refunds or allocations of interest
earnings required by the cash management improvement act. Refunds of interest
to the federal treasury required under the cash management improvement act fall
under RCW 43.88.180 and shall not require appropriation. The office of
financial management shall determine the amounts due to or from the federal
government pursuant to the cash management improvement act. The office of
financial management may direct transfers of funds between accounts as deemed
necessary to implement the provisions of the cash management improvement act,
and this subsection. Refunds or allocations shall occur prior to the distributions
of earnings set forth in subsection (4) of this section.

(3) Except for the
provisions of RCW 43.84.160, the treasury income account may be utilized for
the payment of purchased banking services on behalf of treasury funds
including, but not limited to, depository, safekeeping, and disbursement
functions for the state treasury and affected state agencies. The treasury
income account is subject in all respects to chapter 43.88 RCW, but no
appropriation is required for payments to financial institutions. Payments
shall occur prior to distribution of earnings set forth in subsection (4) of
this section.

(4) Monthly, the state
treasurer shall distribute the earnings credited to the treasury income
account. The state treasurer shall credit the general fund with all the
earnings credited to the treasury income account except:

(a) The following
accounts and funds shall receive their proportionate share of earnings based
upon each account's and fund's average daily balance for the period: The
capitol building construction account, the Cedar River channel construction and
operation account, the Central Washington University capital projects account,
the charitable, educational, penal and reformatory institutions account, the
common school construction fund, the contractor registration account,
the county criminal justice assistance account, the county sales and use tax
equalization account, the data processing building construction account, the
deferred compensation administrative account, the deferred compensation
principal account, the department of retirement systems expense account, the
drinking water assistance account, the Eastern Washington University capital
projects account, the education construction fund, the emergency reserve fund,
the federal forest revolving account, the health services account, the public
health services account, the health system capacity account, the personal
health services account, the state higher education construction account, the
higher education construction account, the highway infrastructure account, the
industrial insurance premium refund account, the judges' retirement account,
the judicial retirement administrative account, the judicial retirement
principal account, the local leasehold excise tax account, the local real
estate excise tax account, the local sales and use tax account, the medical aid
account, the mobile home park relocation fund, the multimodal transportation
account, the municipal criminal justice assistance account, the municipal sales
and use tax equalization account, the natural resources deposit account, the
perpetual surveillance and maintenance account, the public employees'
retirement system plan 1 account, the public employees' retirement system
combined plan 2 and plan 3 account, the Puyallup tribal settlement account, the
resource management cost account, the site closure account, the special
wildlife account, the state employees' insurance account, the state employees'
insurance reserve account, the state investment board expense account, the
state investment board commingled trust fund accounts, the supplemental pension
account, the teachers' retirement system plan 1 account, the teachers'
retirement system combined plan 2 and plan 3 account, the tobacco prevention
and control account, the tobacco settlement account, the transportation
infrastructure account, the tuition recovery trust fund, the University of
Washington bond retirement fund, the University of Washington building account,
the volunteer fire fighters' and reserve officers' relief and pension principal
fund, the volunteer fire fighters' and reserve officers' administrative fund,
the Washington judicial retirement system account, the Washington law
enforcement officers' and fire fighters' system plan 1 retirement account, the
Washington law enforcement officers' and fire fighters' system plan 2
retirement account, the Washington school employees' retirement system combined
plan 2 and 3 account, the Washington state health insurance pool account, the
Washington state patrol retirement account, the Washington State University
building account, the Washington State University bond retirement fund, the
water pollution control revolving fund, and the Western Washington University
capital projects account. Earnings derived from investing balances of the
agricultural permanent fund, the normal school permanent fund, the permanent
common school fund, the scientific permanent fund, and the state university
permanent fund shall be allocated to their respective beneficiary accounts. All
earnings to be distributed under this subsection (4)(a) shall first be reduced
by the allocation to the state treasurer's service fund pursuant to RCW
43.08.190.

(b) The following
accounts and funds shall receive eighty percent of their proportionate share of
earnings based upon each account's or fund's average daily balance for the
period: The aeronautics account, the aircraft search and rescue account, the
county arterial preservation account, the department of licensing services
account, the essential rail assistance account, the ferry bond retirement fund,
the grade crossing protective fund, the high capacity transportation account,
the highway bond retirement fund, the highway safety account, the motor vehicle
fund, the motorcycle safety education account, the pilotage account, the public
transportation systems account, the Puget Sound capital construction account,
the Puget Sound ferry operations account, the recreational vehicle account, the
rural arterial trust account, the safety and education account, the special
category C account, the state patrol highway account, the transportation
equipment fund, the transportation fund, the transportation improvement
account, the transportation improvement board bond retirement account, and the
urban arterial trust account.

(5) In conformance with
Article II, section 37 of the state Constitution, no treasury accounts or funds
shall be allocated earnings without the specific affirmative directive of this
section.

Sec. 23. RCW 18.27.075 and 1983 c
74 s 2 are each amended to read as follows:

The department may not
set a fee higher than ((fifty)) one hundred dollars for issuing
or renewing a certificate of registration during the 2001-2003 biennium.
The department shall revise this amount at least once every two years for the
purpose of recognizing economic changes as reflected by the fiscal growth
factor under chapter 43.135 RCW.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
24. Section 21 of this act
expires March 1, 2002.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 25. Section 22 of this act
takes effect March 1, 2002.

---
END ---