BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF
WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1. RCW 70.38.111 and 1997 c
210 s 1 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) The department
shall not require a certificate of need for the offering of an inpatient
tertiary health service by:

(a) A health
maintenance organization or a combination of health maintenance organizations
if (i) the organization or combination of organizations has, in the service
area of the organization or the service areas of the organizations in the
combination, an enrollment of at least fifty thousand individuals, (ii) the
facility in which the service will be provided is or will be geographically
located so that the service will be reasonably accessible to such enrolled
individuals, and (iii) at least seventy-five percent of the patients who can
reasonably be expected to receive the tertiary health service will be
individuals enrolled with such organization or organizations in the
combination;

(b) A health care
facility if (i) the facility primarily provides or will provide inpatient
health services, (ii) the facility is or will be controlled, directly or
indirectly, by a health maintenance organization or a combination of health
maintenance organizations which has, in the service area of the organization or
service areas of the organizations in the combination, an enrollment of at
least fifty thousand individuals, (iii) the facility is or will be
geographically located so that the service will be reasonably accessible to
such enrolled individuals, and (iv) at least seventy-five percent of the
patients who can reasonably be expected to receive the tertiary health service
will be individuals enrolled with such organization or organizations in the
combination; or

(c) A health care
facility (or portion thereof) if (i) the facility is or will be leased by a
health maintenance organization or combination of health maintenance
organizations which has, in the service area of the organization or the service
areas of the organizations in the combination, an enrollment of at least fifty
thousand individuals and, on the date the application is submitted under
subsection (2) of this section, at least fifteen years remain in the term of
the lease, (ii) the facility is or will be geographically located so that the
service will be reasonably accessible to such enrolled individuals, and (iii)
at least seventy-five percent of the patients who can reasonably be expected to
receive the tertiary health service will be individuals enrolled with such
organization;

if, with respect to such
offering or obligation by a nursing home, the department has, upon application
under subsection (2) of this section, granted an exemption from such
requirement to the organization, combination of organizations, or facility.

(2) A health
maintenance organization, combination of health maintenance organizations, or
health care facility shall not be exempt under subsection (1) of this section
from obtaining a certificate of need before offering a tertiary health service
unless:

(a) It has submitted at
least thirty days prior to the offering of services reviewable under RCW
70.38.105(4)(d) an application for such exemption; and

(b) The application
contains such information respecting the organization, combination, or facility
and the proposed offering or obligation by a nursing home as the department may
require to determine if the organization or combination meets the requirements
of subsection (1) of this section or the facility meets or will meet such
requirements; and

(c) The department
approves such application. The department shall approve or disapprove an
application for exemption within thirty days of receipt of a completed
application. In the case of a proposed health care facility (or portion
thereof) which has not begun to provide tertiary health services on the date an
application is submitted under this subsection with respect to such facility
(or portion), the facility (or portion) shall meet the applicable requirements
of subsection (1) of this section when the facility first provides such
services. The department shall approve an application submitted under this
subsection if it determines that the applicable requirements of subsection (1)
of this section are met.

(3) A health care
facility (or any part thereof) with respect to which an exemption was granted
under subsection (1) of this section may not be sold or leased and a
controlling interest in such facility or in a lease of such facility may not be
acquired and a health care facility described in (1)(c) which was granted an
exemption under subsection (1) of this section may not be used by any person
other than the lessee described in (1)(c) unless:

(a) The department
issues a certificate of need approving the sale, lease, acquisition, or use; or

(b) The department
determines, upon application, that (i) the entity to which the facility is proposed
to be sold or leased, which intends to acquire the controlling interest, or
which intends to use the facility is a health maintenance organization or a
combination of health maintenance organizations which meets the requirements of
(1)(a)(i), and (ii) with respect to such facility, meets the requirements of
(1)(a)(ii) or (iii) or the requirements of (1)(b)(i) and (ii).

(4) In the case of a
health maintenance organization, an ambulatory care facility, or a health care
facility, which ambulatory or health care facility is controlled, directly or
indirectly, by a health maintenance organization or a combination of health
maintenance organizations, the department may under the program apply its
certificate of need requirements only to the offering of inpatient tertiary
health services and then only to the extent that such offering is not exempt
under the provisions of this section.

(5)(a) The department
shall not require a certificate of need for the construction, development, or
other establishment of a nursing home, or the addition of beds to an existing
nursing home, that is owned and operated by a continuing care retirement
community that:

(i) Offers services
only to contractual members;

(ii) Provides its
members a contractually guaranteed range of services from independent living
through skilled nursing, including some assistance with daily living
activities;

(iii) Contractually
assumes responsibility for the cost of services exceeding the member's
financial responsibility under the contract, so that no third party, with the
exception of insurance purchased by the retirement community or its members,
but including the medicaid program, is liable for costs of care even if the
member depletes his or her personal resources;

(iv) Has offered
continuing care contracts and operated a nursing home continuously since
January 1, 1988, or has obtained a certificate of need to establish a nursing
home;

(v) Maintains a binding
agreement with the state assuring that financial liability for services to
members, including nursing home services, will not fall upon the state;

(vi) Does not operate,
and has not undertaken a project that would result in a number of nursing home
beds in excess of one for every four living units operated by the continuing
care retirement community, exclusive of nursing home beds; and

(vii) Has obtained a
professional review of pricing and long-term solvency within the prior five
years which was fully disclosed to members.

(b) A continuing care
retirement community shall not be exempt under this subsection from obtaining a
certificate of need unless:

(i) It has submitted an
application for exemption at least thirty days prior to commencing construction
of, is submitting an application for the licensure of, or is commencing
operation of a nursing home, whichever comes first; and

(ii) The application
documents to the department that the continuing care retirement community
qualifies for exemption.

(c) The sale, lease, acquisition,
or use of part or all of a continuing care retirement community nursing home
that qualifies for exemption under this subsection shall require prior
certificate of need approval to qualify for licensure as a nursing home unless
the department determines such sale, lease, acquisition, or use is by a
continuing care retirement community that meets the conditions of (a) of this
subsection.

(6) A rural hospital,
as defined by the department, reducing the number of licensed beds to become a
rural primary care hospital under the provisions of Part A Title XVIII of the
Social Security Act Section 1820, 42 U.S.C., 1395c et seq. may, within three
years of the reduction of beds licensed under chapter 70.41 RCW, increase the
number of licensed beds to no more than the previously licensed number without
being subject to the provisions of this chapter.

(7) A rural health care
facility licensed under RCW 70.175.100 formerly licensed as a hospital under
chapter 70.41 RCW may, within three years of the effective date of the rural
health care facility license, apply to the department for a hospital license
and not be subject to the requirements of RCW 70.38.105(4)(a) as the
construction, development, or other establishment of a new hospital, provided
there is no increase in the number of beds previously licensed under chapter
70.41 RCW and there is no redistribution in the number of beds used for acute
care or long-term care, the rural health care facility has been in continuous
operation, and the rural health care facility has not been purchased or leased.

(8)(a) A nursing home
that voluntarily reduces the number of its licensed beds to provide assisted
living, licensed boarding home care, adult day care, adult day health, respite
care, hospice, outpatient therapy services, congregate meals, home health, or
senior wellness clinic, or to reduce to one or two the number of beds per room
or to otherwise enhance the quality of life for residents in the nursing home,
may convert the original facility or portion of the facility back, and thereby
increase the number of nursing home beds to no more than the previously
licensed number of nursing home beds without obtaining a certificate of need
under this chapter, provided the facility has been in continuous operation ((and
has not been purchased or leased)) by the person licensed to operate it
under chapter 18.51 RCW at the time of the reduction. Any conversion to
the original licensed bed capacity, or to any portion thereof, shall comply
with the same life and safety code requirements as existed at the time the
nursing home voluntarily reduced its licensed beds; unless waivers from such
requirements were issued, in which case the converted beds shall reflect the
conditions or standards that then existed pursuant to the approved waivers.

(b) To convert beds
back to nursing home beds under this subsection, the nursing home must:

(i) Give notice of its
intent to preserve conversion options to the department of health no later than
thirty days after the effective date of the license reduction; and

(ii) Give notice to the
department of health and to the department of social and health services of the
intent to convert beds back. If construction is required for the conversion of
beds back, the notice of intent to convert beds back must be given, at a
minimum, one year prior to the effective date of license modification
reflecting the restored beds; otherwise, the notice must be given a minimum of
ninety days prior to the effective date of license modification reflecting the
restored beds. Prior to any license modification to convert beds back to
nursing home beds under this section, the licensee must demonstrate that the
nursing home meets the certificate of need exemption requirements of this
section.

The term
"construction," as used in (b)(ii) of this subsection, is limited to
those projects that are expected to equal or exceed the expenditure minimum
amount, as determined under this chapter.

(c) ((Conversion of
beds back under this subsection must be completed no later than four years
after the effective date of the license reduction. However, for good cause
shown, the four-year period for conversion may be extended by the department of
health for one additional four-year period.

(d))) Nursing home beds that have been voluntarily
reduced under this section shall be counted as available nursing home beds for
the purpose of evaluating need under RCW 70.38.115(2) (a) and (k) so long as
the facility retains the ability to convert them back to nursing home use under
the terms of this section.

(((e))) (d)
When a building owner has secured an interest in the nursing home beds, which
are intended to be voluntarily reduced by the licensee under (a) of this
subsection, the applicant shall provide the department with a written statement
indicating the building owner's approval of the bed reduction.

Sec. 2. RCW 70.38.115 and 1996 c
178 s 22 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) Certificates of
need shall be issued, denied, suspended, or revoked by the designee of the
secretary in accord with the provisions of this chapter and rules of the
department which establish review procedures and criteria for the certificate
of need program.

(2) Criteria for the
review of certificate of need applications, except as provided in subsection
(3) of this section for health maintenance organizations, shall include but not
be limited to consideration of the following:

(a) The need that the
population served or to be served by such services has for such services;

(b) The availability of
less costly or more effective alternative methods of providing such services;

(c) The financial
feasibility and the probable impact of the proposal on the cost of and charges
for providing health services in the community to be served;

(d) In the case of
health services to be provided, (i) the availability of alternative uses of
project resources for the provision of other health services, (ii) the extent
to which such proposed services will be accessible to all residents of the area
to be served, and (iii) the need for and the availability in the community of
services and facilities for osteopathic physicians and surgeons and allopathic
physicians and their patients. The department shall consider the application
in terms of its impact on existing and proposed institutional training programs
for doctors of osteopathic medicine and surgery and medicine at the student,
internship, and residency training levels;

(e) In the case of a
construction project, the costs and methods of the proposed construction,
including the cost and methods of energy provision, and the probable impact of
the construction project reviewed (i) on the cost of providing health services
by the person proposing such construction project and (ii) on the cost and
charges to the public of providing health services by other persons;

(f) The special needs
and circumstances of osteopathic hospitals, nonallopathic services and
children's hospitals;

(g) Improvements or
innovations in the financing and delivery of health services which foster cost
containment and serve to promote quality assurance and cost-effectiveness;

(h) In the case of
health services proposed to be provided, the efficiency and appropriateness of
the use of existing services and facilities similar to those proposed;

(i) In the case of
existing services or facilities, the quality of care provided by such services
or facilities in the past;

(j) In the case of
hospital certificate of need applications, whether the hospital meets or
exceeds the regional average level of charity care, as determined by the
secretary; and

(k) In the case of
nursing home applications:

(i) The availability of
other nursing home beds in the planning area to be served; and

(ii) The availability
of other services in the community to be served. Data used to determine the
availability of other services will include but not be limited to data provided
by the department of social and health services.

(3) A certificate of
need application of a health maintenance organization or a health care facility
which is controlled, directly or indirectly, by a health maintenance
organization, shall be approved by the department if the department finds:

(a) Approval of such
application is required to meet the needs of the members of the health
maintenance organization and of the new members which such organization can
reasonably be expected to enroll; and

(b) The health
maintenance organization is unable to provide, through services or facilities
which can reasonably be expected to be available to the organization, its
health services in a reasonable and cost-effective manner which is consistent
with the basic method of operation of the organization and which makes such
services available on a long-term basis through physicians and other health
professionals associated with it.

A health care facility,
or any part thereof, with respect to which a certificate of need was issued
under this subsection may not be sold or leased and a controlling interest in
such facility or in a lease of such facility may not be acquired unless the
department issues a certificate of need approving the sale, acquisition, or
lease.

(4) Until the final
expiration of the state health plan as provided under RCW 70.38.919, the
decision of the department on a certificate of need application shall be
consistent with the state health plan in effect, except in emergency
circumstances which pose a threat to the public health. The department in
making its final decision may issue a conditional certificate of need if it
finds that the project is justified only under specific circumstances. The
conditions shall directly relate to the project being reviewed. The conditions
may be released if it can be substantiated that the conditions are no longer
valid and the release of such conditions would be consistent with the purposes
of this chapter.

(5) Criteria adopted
for review in accordance with subsection (2) of this section may vary according
to the purpose for which the particular review is being conducted or the type
of health service reviewed.

(6) The department
shall specify information to be required for certificate of need applications.
Within fifteen days of receipt of the application, the department shall request
additional information considered necessary to the application or start the
review process. Applicants may decline to submit requested information through
written notice to the department, in which case review starts on the date of
receipt of the notice. Applications may be denied or limited because of
failure to submit required and necessary information.

(7) Concurrent review
is for the purpose of comparative analysis and evaluation of competing or similar
projects in order to determine which of the projects may best meet identified
needs. Categories of projects subject to concurrent review include at least
new health care facilities, new services, and expansion of existing health care
facilities. The department shall specify time periods for the submission of
applications for certificates of need subject to concurrent review, which shall
not exceed ninety days. Review of concurrent applications shall start fifteen
days after the conclusion of the time period for submission of applications
subject to concurrent review. Concurrent review periods shall be limited to
one hundred fifty days, except as provided for in rules adopted by the
department authorizing and limiting amendment during the course of the review,
or for an unresolved pivotal issue declared by the department.

(8) Review periods for
certificate of need applications other than those subject to concurrent review
shall be limited to ninety days. Review periods may be extended up to thirty
days if needed by a review agency, and for unresolved pivotal issues the
department may extend up to an additional thirty days. A review may be
extended in any case if the applicant agrees to the extension.

(9) The department or
its designee, shall conduct a public hearing on a certificate of need
application if requested unless the review is expedited or subject to emergency
review. The department by rule shall specify the period of time within which a
public hearing must be requested and requirements related to public notice of
the hearing, procedures, recordkeeping and related matters.

(10)(a) Any applicant
denied a certificate of need or whose certificate of need has been suspended or
revoked has the right to an adjudicative proceeding. The proceeding is
governed by chapter 34.05 RCW, the Administrative Procedure Act.

(b) Any health care
facility or health maintenance organization that: (i) Provides services
similar to the services provided by the applicant and under review pursuant to
this subsection; (ii) is located within the applicant's health service area;
and (iii) testified or submitted evidence at a public hearing held pursuant to
subsection (9) of this section, shall be provided an opportunity to present
oral or written testimony and argument in a proceeding under this subsection:
PROVIDED, That the health care facility or health maintenance organization had,
in writing, requested to be informed of the department's decisions.

(c) If the department
desires to settle with the applicant prior to the conclusion of the
adjudicative proceeding, the department shall so inform the health care
facility or health maintenance organization and afford them an opportunity to
comment, in advance, on the proposed settlement.

(11) An amended
certificate of need shall be required for the following modifications of an
approved project:

(a) A new service
requiring review under this chapter;

(b) An expansion of a
service subject to review beyond that originally approved;

(c) An increase in bed
capacity;

(d) A significant
reduction in the scope of a nursing home project without a commensurate
reduction in the cost of the nursing home project, or a cost increase (as
represented in bids on a nursing home construction project or final cost
estimates acceptable to the person to whom the certificate of need was issued)
if the total of such increases exceeds twelve percent or fifty thousand
dollars, whichever is greater, over the maximum capital expenditure approved.
The review of reductions or cost increases shall be restricted to the continued
conformance of the nursing home project with the review criteria pertaining to
financial feasibility and cost containment.

(12) An application for
a certificate of need for a nursing home capital expenditure which is determined
by the department to be required to eliminate or prevent imminent safety
hazards or correct violations of applicable licensure and accreditation
standards shall be approved.

(13)(a) Replacement of
existing nursing home beds in the same planning area by an existing licensee
who has operated the beds for at least one year shall not require a certificate
of need under this chapter. The licensee shall give written notice of its
intent to replace the existing nursing home beds to the department and shall
provide the department with information as may be required pursuant to rule.
Replacement of the beds by a party other than the licensee is subject to
certificate of need review under this chapter, except as otherwise permitted by
subsection (14) of this section.

(b) When an entire
nursing home ceases operation, the licensee or any other party who has secured
an interest in the beds may reserve his or her interest in the beds for eight
years or until a certificate of need to replace them is issued, whichever occurs
first. However, the nursing home, licensee, or any other party who has secured
an interest in the beds must give notice of its intent to retain the beds to
the department of health no later than thirty days after the effective date of
the facility's closure. Certificate of need review shall be required for any
party who has reserved the nursing home beds except that the need criteria
shall be deemed met when the applicant is the licensee who had operated the
beds for at least one year, who has operated the beds for at least one year
immediately preceding the reservation of the beds, and who is replacing the
beds in the same planning area.

(14) In
the event that a licensee, who has provided the department with notice of his
or her intent to replace nursing home beds under subsection (13)(a) of this
section, engages in unprofessional conduct or becomes unable to practice with
reasonable skill and safety by reason of mental or physical condition, pursuant
to chapter 18.130 RCW, ((or)) dies, or files for or otherwise
declares bankruptcy, the building owner shall be permitted to complete the
nursing home bed replacement project, provided the building owner has secured
an interest in the beds.

---
END ---