BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF
WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec.
1. The legislature finds
that long-term care providers in the state of Washington are reporting
unprecedented labor vacancies, particularly for those paraprofessionals who
provide direct hands-on care to some of the most medically vulnerable citizens
of our state.

It is the intent of
this act to increase the stability of long-term care paraprofessional
employment by supporting enhanced wages and benefits for those long-term care
paraprofessional workers who provide direct hands-on care for state-funded
clients in nursing homes, boarding homes, adult family homes, community
residential settings for the developmentally disabled or mentally ill, or
clients' own homes.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
2. A new section is added
to chapter 74.39A RCW to read as follows:

As used in sections 3
and 4 of this act:

(1) "Long-term
care paraprofessional worker" means:

(a) A nonlicensed
worker providing direct hands-on care to a medicaid client in a nursing home
under chapter 18.51 RCW, boarding home under chapter 18.20 RCW, adult family
home under chapter 70.128 RCW, or developmental disability residential program
under chapter 71.12 RCW; or

(b) A nonlicensed
worker providing direct hands-on care to a functionally disabled person in the
person's own home through medicaid personal care as described in RCW 74.09.520,
community options program entry system waiver services as described in RCW
74.39A.030, or chore services as described in RCW 74.39A.110 as an individual
provider or employee of a home care agency under chapter 70.127 RCW.

(2) "Long-term
care para professional worker" does not include janitorial staff, food
service staff, or any other nondirect care staff working in a nursing home,
group home, or boarding home facility, or an owner, operator, or manager of a
nursing home, group home, boarding home, or adult family home.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
3. A new section is added
to chapter 74.39A RCW to read as follows:

(1) The department of
social and health services shall establish a wage enhancement program to
enhance the wages of long-term care paraprofessional workers. Facilities,
organizations, and agencies that employ or contract with long-term care
paraprofessional workers may voluntarily participate in the program. Under the
program, the department of social and health services shall provide
participating facilities, organizations, and agencies with funds to enhance the
wages of long-term care paraprofessional workers based on the proportion of
worker hours that may be reasonably apportioned to the care of medicaid clients
compared to the total number of hours of care for all clients of the facility
or home. Wage enhancement funds shall be available for both current workers
and additional long-term care paraprofessional workers. Participating
facilities, organizations, and agencies shall provide worker and medicaid
client data as determined necessary by the department of social and health
services. The department shall develop standards for determining how the wage
enhancement funds are to be distributed to participating facilities,
organizations, and agencies, and reporting requirements needed to determine how
wage enhancement funds provided under this act shall be distributed to each
long-term care paraprofessional worker. Facilities, organizations, and
agencies participating in the wage enhancement program shall report to the
department retrospectively on how the funds were distributed. All funds
provided to a participating facility, organization, or agency must be used only
to directly enhance the wages of long-term care paraprofessional workers.
Participating facilities, organizations, and agencies are prohibited from
arbitrarily reducing the wages of any long-term care paraprofessional worker on
or after July 1, 2001, through July 2, 2002. Any funds received under this act
that are not expended for the purposes of this act must be returned to the
department.

(a) On July 1, 2001,
participating facilities, organizations, and agencies shall increase by one
dollar per hour, plus an amount equal to mandatory federal and state payroll
taxes, the wages paid to each long-term care paraprofessional worker employed
or contracted with by the facility, organization, or agency.

(b) On July 1, 2002,
participating facilities, organizations, and agencies shall increase the wages
paid to all long-term care paraprofessional workers by an average amount of one
dollar per hour, plus an amount equal to mandatory federal and state payroll
taxes. Participating facilities, organizations, and agencies shall determine
the amount of the wage enhancement for each eligible long-term care
paraprofessional worker in accordance with wage increase criteria guidelines
adopted by each participating facility, organization, or agency. The wage
increase criteria guidelines must include consideration of tenure, shift, and
technical performance of duties, unless otherwise established by contract or
bargaining agreement and consistent with existing state and federal law.

(2) The department
shall determine the wage increase amount for persons working in the individual
provider program. The department shall distribute the funding for the July 1,
2002, wage increase so that each participating employer receives an amount
equal to the cost of providing a wage increase of one dollar per hour to each
long-term care paraprofessional worker, plus an amount equal to mandatory
federal and state payroll taxes.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
4. A new section is added
to chapter 43.20A RCW to read as follows:

The department of
social and health services shall distribute to all long-term care
paraprofessional workers as defined in section 2 of this act information
regarding the federal earned income tax credit program. The department's
efforts must include outreach and technical assistance designed to allow all
long-term care paraprofessional workers who are qualified to receive assistance
through the earned income tax credit program.

Sec. 5. RCW 70.47.060 and 2000 c
79 s 34 are each amended to read as follows:

The administrator has
the following powers and duties:

(1) To design and from
time to time revise a schedule of covered basic health care services, including
physician services, inpatient and outpatient hospital services, prescription
drugs and medications, and other services that may be necessary for basic
health care. In addition, the administrator may, to the extent that funds are
available, offer as basic health plan services chemical dependency services,
mental health services and organ transplant services; however, no one service
or any combination of these three services shall increase the actuarial value
of the basic health plan benefits by more than five percent excluding
inflation, as determined by the office of financial management. All subsidized
and nonsubsidized enrollees in any participating managed health care system
under the Washington basic health plan shall be entitled to receive covered
basic health care services in return for premium payments to the plan. The
schedule of services shall emphasize proven preventive and primary health care
and shall include all services necessary for prenatal, postnatal, and
well-child care. However, with respect to coverage for subsidized enrollees
who are eligible to receive prenatal and postnatal services through the medical
assistance program under chapter 74.09 RCW, the administrator shall not
contract for such services except to the extent that such services are
necessary over not more than a one-month period in order to maintain continuity
of care after diagnosis of pregnancy by the managed care provider. The
schedule of services shall also include a separate schedule of basic health
care services for children, eighteen years of age and younger, for those
subsidized or nonsubsidized enrollees who choose to secure basic coverage
through the plan only for their dependent children. In designing and revising
the schedule of services, the administrator shall consider the guidelines for
assessing health services under the mandated benefits act of 1984, RCW
48.47.030, and such other factors as the administrator deems appropriate.

(2)(a) To design and
implement a structure of periodic premiums due the administrator from
subsidized enrollees that is based upon gross family income, giving appropriate
consideration to family size and the ages of all family members. The
enrollment of children shall not require the enrollment of their parent or
parents who are eligible for the plan. The structure of periodic premiums
shall be applied to subsidized enrollees entering the plan as individuals
pursuant to subsection (9) of this section and to the share of the cost of the
plan due from subsidized enrollees entering the plan as employees pursuant to
subsection (10) of this section.

(b) To the extent
funds are specifically appropriated for this purpose, two thousand individual
provider long-term care paraprofessional workers, as defined in section 2 of
this act, who provide care to medicaid clients and who meet the requirements
for a subsidized enrollee in RCW 70.47.020(4), shall be required to pay no more
than the minimum premium share for subsidized enrollees.

(c) To determine
the periodic premiums due the administrator from nonsubsidized enrollees. Premiums
due from nonsubsidized enrollees shall be in an amount equal to the cost
charged by the managed health care system provider to the state for the plan
plus the administrative cost of providing the plan to those enrollees and the
premium tax under RCW 48.14.0201.

(((c))) (d)
An employer or other financial sponsor may, with the prior approval of the
administrator, pay the premium, rate, or any other amount on behalf of a
subsidized or nonsubsidized enrollee, by arrangement with the enrollee and
through a mechanism acceptable to the administrator.

(3) To design and
implement a structure of enrollee cost-sharing due a managed health care system
from subsidized and nonsubsidized enrollees. The structure shall discourage
inappropriate enrollee utilization of health care services, and may utilize
copayments, deductibles, and other cost-sharing mechanisms, but shall not be so
costly to enrollees as to constitute a barrier to appropriate utilization of
necessary health care services.

(4) To limit enrollment
of persons who qualify for subsidies so as to prevent an overexpenditure of
appropriations for such purposes. Whenever the administrator finds that there
is danger of such an overexpenditure, the administrator shall close enrollment
until the administrator finds the danger no longer exists.

(5) To limit the
payment of subsidies to subsidized enrollees, as defined in RCW 70.47.020. The
level of subsidy provided to persons who qualify may be based on the lowest
cost plans, as defined by the administrator.

(6) To adopt a schedule
for the orderly development of the delivery of services and availability of the
plan to residents of the state, subject to the limitations contained in RCW
70.47.080 or any act appropriating funds for the plan.

(7) To solicit and accept
applications from managed health care systems, as defined in this chapter, for
inclusion as eligible basic health care providers under the plan for either
subsidized enrollees, or nonsubsidized enrollees, or both. The administrator
shall endeavor to assure that covered basic health care services are available
to any enrollee of the plan from among a selection of two or more participating
managed health care systems. In adopting any rules or procedures applicable to
managed health care systems and in its dealings with such systems, the
administrator shall consider and make suitable allowance for the need for
health care services and the differences in local availability of health care
resources, along with other resources, within and among the several areas of
the state. Contracts with participating managed health care systems shall
ensure that basic health plan enrollees who become eligible for medical
assistance may, at their option, continue to receive services from their
existing providers within the managed health care system if such providers have
entered into provider agreements with the department of social and health
services.

(8) To receive periodic
premiums from or on behalf of subsidized and nonsubsidized enrollees, deposit
them in the basic health plan operating account, keep records of enrollee
status, and authorize periodic payments to managed health care systems on the
basis of the number of enrollees participating in the respective managed health
care systems.

(9) To accept
applications from individuals residing in areas served by the plan, on behalf
of themselves and their spouses and dependent children, for enrollment in the
Washington basic health plan as subsidized or nonsubsidized enrollees, to
establish appropriate minimum-enrollment periods for enrollees as may be
necessary, and to determine, upon application and on a reasonable schedule
defined by the authority, or at the request of any enrollee, eligibility due to
current gross family income for sliding scale premiums. Funds received by a
family as part of participation in the adoption support program authorized
under RCW 26.33.320 and 74.13.100 through 74.13.145 shall not be counted toward
a family's current gross family income for the purposes of this chapter. When
an enrollee fails to report income or income changes accurately, the
administrator shall have the authority either to bill the enrollee for the
amounts overpaid by the state or to impose civil penalties of up to two hundred
percent of the amount of subsidy overpaid due to the enrollee incorrectly
reporting income. The administrator shall adopt rules to define the
appropriate application of these sanctions and the processes to implement the
sanctions provided in this subsection, within available resources. No subsidy
may be paid with respect to any enrollee whose current gross family income
exceeds twice the federal poverty level or, subject to RCW 70.47.110, who is a
recipient of medical assistance or medical care services under chapter 74.09
RCW. If a number of enrollees drop their enrollment for no apparent good
cause, the administrator may establish appropriate rules or requirements that
are applicable to such individuals before they will be allowed to reenroll in
the plan.

(10) To accept
applications from business owners on behalf of themselves and their employees,
spouses, and dependent children, as subsidized or nonsubsidized enrollees, who
reside in an area served by the plan. The administrator may require all or the
substantial majority of the eligible employees of such businesses to enroll in
the plan and establish those procedures necessary to facilitate the orderly
enrollment of groups in the plan and into a managed health care system. The
administrator may require that a business owner pay at least an amount equal to
what the employee pays after the state pays its portion of the subsidized
premium cost of the plan on behalf of each employee enrolled in the plan.
Enrollment is limited to those not eligible for medicare who wish to enroll in
the plan and choose to obtain the basic health care coverage and services from
a managed care system participating in the plan. The administrator shall
adjust the amount determined to be due on behalf of or from all such enrollees
whenever the amount negotiated by the administrator with the participating
managed health care system or systems is modified or the administrative cost of
providing the plan to such enrollees changes.

(11) To determine the
rate to be paid to each participating managed health care system in return for
the provision of covered basic health care services to enrollees in the
system. Although the schedule of covered basic health care services will be
the same or actuarially equivalent for similar enrollees, the rates negotiated
with participating managed health care systems may vary among the systems. In
negotiating rates with participating systems, the administrator shall consider
the characteristics of the populations served by the respective systems,
economic circumstances of the local area, the need to conserve the resources of
the basic health plan trust account, and other factors the administrator finds
relevant.

(12) To monitor the
provision of covered services to enrollees by participating managed health care
systems in order to assure enrollee access to good quality basic health care,
to require periodic data reports concerning the utilization of health care
services rendered to enrollees in order to provide adequate information for
evaluation, and to inspect the books and records of participating managed
health care systems to assure compliance with the purposes of this chapter. In
requiring reports from participating managed health care systems, including
data on services rendered enrollees, the administrator shall endeavor to
minimize costs, both to the managed health care systems and to the plan. The
administrator shall coordinate any such reporting requirements with other state
agencies, such as the insurance commissioner and the department of health, to
minimize duplication of effort.

(13) To evaluate the
effects this chapter has on private employer-based health care coverage and to
take appropriate measures consistent with state and federal statutes that will
discourage the reduction of such coverage in the state.

(14) To develop a
program of proven preventive health measures and to integrate it into the plan
wherever possible and consistent with this chapter.

(15) To provide,
consistent with available funding, assistance for rural residents, underserved
populations, and persons of color.

(16) In consultation
with appropriate state and local government agencies, to establish criteria
defining eligibility for persons confined or residing in government-operated
institutions.

(17) To administer the
premium discounts provided under RCW 48.41.200(3)(a) (i) and (ii) pursuant to a
contract with the Washington state health insurance pool.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
6. A new section is added
to chapter 28B.15 RCW to read as follows:

(1) The governing boards
of the state universities, the regional universities, The Evergreen State
College, and the community colleges may waive all or a portion of the tuition
and services and activities fees for long-term care paraprofessional workers as
defined in section 2 of this act. The enrollment of these persons is pursuant
to the following conditions:

(a) Such persons shall
register for and be enrolled in courses on a space-available basis, and no new
course sections shall be created as a result of the registration;

(b) Enrollment
information on persons registered pursuant to this section shall be maintained
separately from other enrollment information and shall not be included in
official enrollment reports, nor shall such persons be considered in any
enrollment statistics that would affect budgetary determinations; and

(c) Persons registering
on a space-available basis shall be charged a registration fee of not less than
five dollars.

(2) In awarding
waivers, an institution of higher education may award waivers to eligible
persons employed by the institution before considering waivers for eligible
persons who are not employed by the institution.

(3) In establishing
eligibility to receive waivers, institutions of higher education may not
discriminate between full-time long-term care paraprofessional workers and
half-time or more long-term care paraprofessional workers.

Sec. 7. RCW 74.46.165 and 1998 c
322 s 10 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) Contractors shall
be required to submit with each annual nursing facility cost report a proposed
settlement report showing underspending or overspending in each component rate
during the cost report year on a per-resident day basis. The department shall
accept or reject the proposed settlement report, explain any adjustments, and
issue a revised settlement report if needed.

(2) Contractors shall
not be required to refund payments made in the operations, property, and return
on investment component rates in excess of the adjusted costs of providing
services corresponding to these components.

(3) Participating
facilities will return to the department any unspent funds in the wage
enhancement component rate. The facility will return to the department any
overpayment amounts in each of the direct care, therapy care, and support
services rate components that the department identifies following the audit and
settlement procedures as described in this chapter, provided that the
contractor may retain any overpayment that does not exceed 1.0% of the
facility's direct care, therapy care, and support services component rate.
However, no overpayments may be retained in a cost center to which savings have
been shifted to cover a deficit, as provided in subsection (4) of this
section. Facilities that are not in substantial compliance for more than
ninety days, and facilities that provide substandard quality of care at any
time, during the period for which settlement is being calculated, will not be
allowed to retain any amount of overpayment in the facility's direct care,
therapy care, and support services component rate. The terms "not in
substantial compliance" and "substandard quality of care" shall
be defined by federal survey regulations.

(4) Determination of
unused rate funds, including the amounts of direct care, therapy care, and
support services to be recovered, shall be done separately for each component
rate, and neither costs nor rate payments shall be shifted from one component
rate or corresponding service area to another in determining the degree of
underspending or recovery, if any. However, in computing a preliminary or
final settlement, savings in the support services cost center may be shifted to
cover a deficit in the direct care or therapy cost centers up to the amount of
any savings. Not more than twenty percent of the rate in a cost center may be
shifted.

(5) Total and component
payment rates assigned to a nursing facility, as calculated and revised, if
needed, under the provisions of this chapter and those rules as the department
may adopt, shall represent the maximum payment for nursing facility services
rendered to medicaid recipients for the period the rates are in effect. No
increase in payment to a contractor shall result from spending above the total
payment rate or in any rate component.

(6) RCW 74.46.150
through 74.46.180, and rules adopted by the department prior to July 1, 1998,
shall continue to govern the medicaid settlement process for periods prior to
October 1, 1998, as if these statutes and rules remained in full force and
effect.

(7) For calendar year
1998, the department shall calculate split settlements covering January 1,
1998, through September 30, 1998, and October 1, 1998, through December 31,
1998. For the period beginning October 1, 1998, rules specified in this
chapter shall apply. The department shall, by rule, determine the division of
calendar year 1998 adjusted costs for settlement purposes.

Sec. 8. RCW 74.46.431 and 1999 c
353 s 4 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) Effective July 1,
1999, nursing facility medicaid payment rate allocations shall be
facility-specific and shall have seven components: Direct care, therapy care,
support services, operations, property, financing allowance, and variable
return. Effective July 1, 2001, there shall be an additional wage
enhancement medicaid payment rate allocation for facilities electing to
participate. The department shall establish and adjust each of these
components, as provided in this section and elsewhere in this chapter, for each
medicaid nursing facility in this state.

(2) All component rate
allocations shall be based upon a minimum facility occupancy of eighty-five
percent of licensed beds, regardless of how many beds are set up or in use.

(3) Information and
data sources used in determining medicaid payment rate allocations, including
formulas, procedures, cost report periods, resident assessment instrument
formats, resident assessment methodologies, and resident classification and
case mix weighting methodologies, may be substituted or altered from time to
time as determined by the department.

(4)(a) Direct care
component rate allocations shall be established using adjusted cost report data
covering at least six months. Adjusted cost report data from 1996 will be used
for October 1, 1998, through June 30, 2001, direct care component rate
allocations; adjusted cost report data from 1999 will be used for July 1, 2001,
through June 30, 2004, direct care component rate allocations.

(b) Direct care
component rate allocations based on 1996 cost report data shall be adjusted
annually for economic trends and conditions by a factor or factors defined in
the biennial appropriations act. A different economic trends and conditions
adjustment factor or factors may be defined in the biennial appropriations act
for facilities whose direct care component rate is set equal to their adjusted
June 30, 1998, rate, as provided in RCW 74.46.506(5)(k).

(c) Direct care
component rate allocations based on 1999 cost report data shall be adjusted
annually for economic trends and conditions by a factor or factors defined in
the biennial appropriations act. A different economic trends and conditions
adjustment factor or factors may be defined in the biennial appropriations act
for facilities whose direct care component rate is set equal to their adjusted
June 30, 1998, rate, as provided in RCW 74.46.506(5)(k).

(5)(a) Therapy care
component rate allocations shall be established using adjusted cost report data
covering at least six months. Adjusted cost report data from 1996 will be used
for October 1, 1998, through June 30, 2001, therapy care component rate
allocations; adjusted cost report data from 1999 will be used for July 1, 2001,
through June 30, 2004, therapy care component rate allocations.

(b) Therapy care
component rate allocations shall be adjusted annually for economic trends and
conditions by a factor or factors defined in the biennial appropriations act.

(6)(a) Support services
component rate allocations shall be established using adjusted cost report data
covering at least six months. Adjusted cost report data from 1996 shall be
used for October 1, 1998, through June 30, 2001, support services component
rate allocations; adjusted cost report data from 1999 shall be used for July 1,
2001, through June 30, 2004, support services component rate allocations.

(b) Support services
component rate allocations shall be adjusted annually for economic trends and
conditions by a factor or factors defined in the biennial appropriations act.

(7)(a) Operations
component rate allocations shall be established using adjusted cost report data
covering at least six months. Adjusted cost report data from 1996 shall be
used for October 1, 1998, through June 30, 2001, operations component rate
allocations; adjusted cost report data from 1999 shall be used for July 1,
2001, through June 30, 2004, operations component rate allocations.

(b) Operations
component rate allocations shall be adjusted annually for economic trends and
conditions by a factor or factors defined in the biennial appropriations act.

(8) For July 1, 1998,
through September 30, 1998, a facility's property and return on investment
component rates shall be the facility's June 30, 1998, property and return on investment
component rates, without increase. For October 1, 1998, through June 30, 1999,
a facility's property and return on investment component rates shall be rebased
utilizing 1997 adjusted cost report data covering at least six months of data.

(9) Total payment rates
under the nursing facility medicaid payment system shall not exceed facility
rates charged to the general public for comparable services.

(10) Medicaid
contractors shall pay to all facility staff a minimum wage of the greater of
five dollars and fifteen cents per hour or the federal minimum wage.

(11) The department
shall establish in rule procedures, principles, and conditions for determining
component rate allocations for facilities in circumstances not directly
addressed by this chapter, including but not limited to: The need to prorate
inflation for partial-period cost report data, newly constructed facilities,
existing facilities entering the medicaid program for the first time or after a
period of absence from the program, existing facilities with expanded new bed
capacity, existing medicaid facilities following a change of ownership of the
nursing facility business, facilities banking beds or converting beds back into
service, facilities having less than six months of either resident assessment,
cost report data, or both, under the current contractor prior to rate setting,
and other circumstances.

(12) The department
shall establish in rule procedures, principles, and conditions, including
necessary threshold costs, for adjusting rates to reflect capital improvements
or new requirements imposed by the department or the federal government. Any
such rate adjustments are subject to the provisions of RCW 74.46.421.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
9. A new section is added
to chapter 74.46 RCW to read as follows:

Effective
July 1, 2001, nursing facility providers shall have the option of participating
in a program to enhance the wages and benefits of nonlicensed paraprofessional
staff as defined in and authorized by chapter 74.39A RCW. Pursuant to
procedures and rules adopted by the department, any nursing facility wishing to
participate may do so, and the department shall calculate for each
participating facility a wage enhancement component rate intended to fund the additional
cost of authorized wage increases for qualifying employees, which shall be
adjusted to reflect the ratio of medicaid hours of care to total hours of care
delivered at the facility. The department shall monitor wage enhancement rate
payments and shall recover all such funds not spent for approved wage
increases. Payments made in the wage enhancement component rate shall not be
subject to the provisions of RCW 74.46.421, but shall not exceed the
appropriation made for this purpose.

---
END ---