BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF
WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec.
1. The legislature finds
that good teachers are the cornerstone of the state's education system. The
legislature also finds that the state has a pool of excellent and experienced
educators who could be an invaluable resource to help beginning teachers weather
their difficult first years of teaching. Research indicates that providing
mentors for first year teachers results in an improved retention rate of those
teachers, therefore every beginning teacher should have an opportunity to work
with a trained peer mentor. Research also indicates that mentors must be
skilled and well-trained in order to effectively assist new teachers. The
legislature finds that matching excellent educators with new teachers will help
school districts begin to develop additional leadership and compensation
opportunities for those exemplary teachers who act as mentors for beginning
teachers and other interested colleagues. The legislature further finds that
the existing beginning teacher assistance program needs to be refocused to more
effectively provide training and peer mentors for new teachers.

The legislature intends
to refocus the beginning teacher assistance program and replace it with a peer
mentor program that emphasizes close working relationships between a beginning
teacher and an experienced peer mentor, frequent observations, the development
and implementation of professional development plans, the provision to
beginning teachers of assistance in devising strategies to raise student
achievement, and high-quality research-based training programs for peer
mentors.

Sec. 2. RCW 28A.415.250 and 1993
c 336 s 401 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) The peer mentor
program is established. The purpose of the program is to nurture professional
growth and excellence in a beginning teacher through special training and
focused assistance provided by an experienced, trained, and excellent peer
mentor.

(2) To the extent
that funding is provided for this specific purpose, the superintendent of
public instruction shall ((adopt rules to establish and operate a teacher
assistance program. For the purposes of this section, the terms "mentor
teachers," "beginning teachers," and "experienced
teachers" may include any person possessing any one of the various
certificates issued by the superintendent of public instruction under RCW
28A.410.010. The program shall provide for:

(1) Assistance by
mentor teachers who will provide a source of continuing and sustained support
to beginning teachers, or experienced teachers who are having difficulties, or
both, both in and outside the classroom. A mentor teacher may not be involved
in evaluations under RCW 28A.405.100 of a teacher who receives assistance from
said mentor teacher under the teacher assistance program established under this
section. The mentor teachers shall also periodically inform their principals
respecting the contents of training sessions and other program activities;

(2) Stipends for
mentor teachers and beginning and experienced teachers which shall not be
deemed compensation for the purposes of salary lid compliance under RCW
28A.400.200: PROVIDED, That stipends shall not be subject to the continuing
contract provisions of this title;

(3) Workshops for
the training of mentor and beginning teachers;

(4) The use of
substitutes to give mentor teachers, beginning teachers, and experienced
teachers opportunities to jointly observe and evaluate teaching situations and
to give mentor teachers opportunities to observe and assist beginning and
experienced teachers in the classroom;

(5) Mentor teachers
who are superior teachers based on their evaluations, pursuant to RCW
28A.405.010 through 28A.405.240, and who hold valid continuing certificates;

(6) Mentor teachers
shall be selected by the district and may serve as mentors up to and including
full time. If a bargaining unit, certified pursuant to RCW 41.59.090 exists
within the district, classroom teachers representing the bargaining unit shall
participate in the mentor teacher selection process; and

(7) Periodic
consultation by the superintendent of public instruction or the
superintendent's designee with representatives of educational organizations and
associations, including educational service districts and public and private
institutions of higher education, for the purposes of improving communication
and cooperation and program review))
distribute funding to an eligible peer mentor program. An eligible peer
mentor program is a program that provides to a beginning teacher services that
include but need not be limited to:

(a) An orientation
process and individualized assistance to help a beginning teacher prepare for
the start of a school year;

(b) The assignment
of a peer mentor whose responsibilities to the beginning teacher include but
need not be limited to constructive feedback, the modeling of instructional
strategies, and frequent meetings and other forms of contact;

(c) The provision by
peer mentors of strategies, training, and guidance in critical areas such as
classroom management, student discipline, curriculum management, instructional
skill, assessment, communication skills, and professional conduct. A district
may provide these components through a variety of means including one-on-one
contact and workshops offered by peer mentors to groups, including cohort
groups, of beginning teachers;

(d) Since
observation is one of the critical tools that peer mentors need to use to help
assess a beginning teacher's professional development, the provision of release
time, substitutes, mentor training in observation techniques, and other
measures for both peer mentors and beginning teachers, to allow each an
adequate amount of time to observe the other and to provide the classroom
experience that each needs to work together effectively;

(e) Assistance in
the incorporation of the essential academic learning requirements into
instructional plans and in the development of complex teaching strategies, including
strategies to raise the achievement of students with diverse learning styles
and backgrounds;

(f) Guidance and
assistance in the development and implementation of a professional growth
plan. The plan shall include a professional self-evaluation component and one
or more informal performance assessments. A peer mentor may not be involved in
any evaluation under RCW 28A.405.100 of a beginning teacher whom the peer
mentor has assisted through this program.

(3) In addition to
the services provided in subsection (2) of this section, an eligible peer
mentor program shall include but need not be limited to the following
components:

(a) Strong
collaboration among the peer mentor, the beginning teacher's principal, and the
beginning teacher; and

(b) Stipends for
peer mentors and, at the option of a district, for beginning teachers. The
stipends shall not be deemed compensation for the purposes of salary lid
compliance under RCW 28A.400.200 and are not subject to the continuing contract
provisions of this title.

(4) To the extent
that resources are available for this purpose and that assistance to beginning
teachers is not adversely impacted, the program may serve more experienced
teachers who request the assistance of peer mentors.

(5) To the extent
that funding is provided for this specific purpose, the superintendent of
public instruction shall operate a mentor academy to help districts provide
effective training for peer mentors. Districts are encouraged to include in
their programs academy training for peer mentors.

(6) To the maximum
extent possible, the superintendent shall simplify and minimize reporting
requirements for the peer mentor program. As part of the program, the
superintendent may develop a system to track data on the teaching assignments,
retention, and mobility of beginning teachers and may conduct surveys of
participants to assess program effectiveness. Districts that are participating
in the peer mentor program shall provide such data to the tracking system.

(7) By December 1,
2001, districts shall incorporate into their state-funded assistance programs
for beginning teachers the requirements in subsection (2) of this section.
Until December 1, 2001, districts may receive state funds to assist beginning
teachers without meeting all the requirements of subsection (2) of this
section.

(8) The definitions
in this subsection apply throughout this section.

(a) "Peer
mentor" means an educator, including an individual in retirement status,
who is selected by the district to serve in that capacity up to and including
full time, and who meets the following qualifications:

(i) Possession of
one or more valid certificates issued by the superintendent of public
instruction under RCW 28A.410.010;

(ii) Possession of
five or more years of teaching experience;

(iii) Stature as an
excellent teacher as determined by criteria developed by the district in
cooperation with the local bargaining unit representing classroom teachers;

(iv) Experience,
skills, and interest in facilitating adult learning.

If a bargaining unit,
certified pursuant to RCW 41.59.090, exists within the district, classroom
teachers representing the bargaining unit shall participate in the peer mentor
selection process.

(b) "Beginning
teacher" means a first or second year teacher who holds a valid residency,
provisional, or initial certificate issued by the superintendent of public
instruction under RCW 28A.410.010.

(c) "Mentor
academy" means a statewide training program for peer mentors organized and
coordinated by the superintendent of public instruction, in consultation with
the state board of education, the professional educator standards board, the
association of school principals, and other interested organizations.

(d)
"District" means a school district or educational service district.

---
END ---