BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF
WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec.
1. The purpose of this
section is to further the policy of the state of Washington to encourage and
assist persons with disabilities to achieve personal independence, through
expanded employment and employment opportunities. The legislature intends to
accomplish this purpose specifically by increasing the number of persons with
disabilities employed, improving wages earned, and enhancing opportunities for
integrated employment.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
2. The definitions in this
section apply throughout this chapter unless the context clearly requires
otherwise.

(1) "Central
nonprofit agency" means a private tax-exempt organization with
relationships to a statewide network of community rehabilitation programs and
with experience and capability in both procurement and contracting, and
disability employment issues.

(2) "Certified
community rehabilitation program" means a program approved by the
department of social and health services that directly provides or facilitates
the provision of vocational rehabilitation and employment services to people
with disabilities to enable them to maximize opportunities for employment,
including career advancement.

(3)
"Commission" means the commission for purchase of products and
services from persons with disabilities.

(4)
"Disabilities" means physical, mental, or sensory impairments that
would impede a person from obtaining and maintaining permanent employment and
obtaining opportunities for promotion. The impairments must be material rather
than slight and must be static and permanent in that they are seldom fully
corrected by medical replacement, therapy, or surgical means.

(5) "Equitable
market value" means the price determined by the commission. The equitable
market value shall be determined through consideration of current market
pricing for goods or services of equal quality and value. It may include a
negotiated bid process that takes into consideration: Last price bid,
established pricing as derived through averaging of current comparable
contracts, the effect of changes in specifications, supply costs, and other
current market variables.

(6) "State
agency" means all offices, departments, agencies, institutions, boards,
and commissions of state government including those headed by an elected
official but not including institutions of higher education.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
3. State agencies shall,
where possible, purchase products and services from certified community
rehabilitation programs provided that such services and products are of
standard price and quality, and have been certified by the commission, and
placed on the commission's list of certified products and services.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
4. (1) A commission for
purchase of products and services from persons with disabilities is created in
the division of vocational rehabilitation in the department of social and
health services to facilitate and oversee the purchase of products and services
produced by persons with disabilities who are employed by certified community
rehabilitation programs. The commission is composed of eight members, five of
whom are appointed by the governor, consisting of one representative from:

(a) One division from
the health and rehabilitation cluster of the department of social and health
services;

(b) The governor's
committee on disability issues and employment;

(c) An advocacy
organization for people with disabilities;

(d) A certified
community rehabilitation program; and

(e) The department of
general administration.

(2) The commission
members appointed by the governor shall appoint three additional at-large
members.

(3) Members of the
commission serve four-year terms. Members may not receive compensation for
their service on the commission, but they are entitled to reimbursement for
actual and necessary expenses incurred in performing their duties as members as
set forth in RCW 43.03.050 and 43.03.060.

(4) The commission
shall meet four times per year, or as often as necessary to conduct its
business. The commission shall select a chairperson from among its members at
its first meeting.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
5. The commission shall:

(1) Develop and
administer policies and procedures to be followed by certified community
rehabilitation programs, consistent with sections 1 through 7 of this act;

(2) Develop criteria
for certification and certify community rehabilitation programs;

(3) Review all
products, services, and bids, and establish an equitable market value for all
products and services provided by persons who are disabled and employed by
certified community rehabilitation programs. Such price shall recover all
reasonable direct and indirect costs associated with the production and
delivery of products and services to the state;

(4) Approve and issue a
publication that lists all products and services currently available from
certified community rehabilitation programs. Such a list and revisions shall
be made available to the purchasing officers of all state agencies;

(5) Prepare and issue a
report annually to the governor and the legislature. The report shall be
consistent with the purposes of sections 1 through 7 of this act, and shall
describe the benefits of certified community rehabilitation programs to the
state of Washington and to persons with disabilities.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
6. The commission shall
immediately designate a central nonprofit agency that has as its main purpose
the representation of the interests of individuals who are disabled and are
employed by certified community rehabilitation programs, and the certified
community rehabilitation programs providing rehabilitation services and
employment for persons with disabilities. The purpose of the designated
central nonprofit agency is to provide support for the activities and purposes
of the commission. The central nonprofit agency is authorized to coordinate
the activities among the commission, certified community rehabilitation
programs, and the department of general administration. It shall provide
administrative support as necessary to the commission in the conduct of its
duties and responsibilities. It shall be financed by a fee generated through
the contracts between certified community rehabilitation programs and the state
and regulated by the commission. It shall assist the commission in determining
the eligibility of community rehabilitation programs for certification, and it
shall oversee for the commission the compliance with contract and quality
standards required by the purchasing authority.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
7. Sections 1 through 6 of
this act shall not apply in any case where products and services are available
by prior agreement between any state agency with another state agency.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
8. Sections 1 through 7 of
this act are each added to chapter 43.19 RCW.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
9. If any provision of this
act or its application to any person or circumstance is held invalid, the
remainder of the act or the application of the provision to other persons or
circumstances is not affected.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 10. This act takes effect
January 1, 2003.

---
END ---