BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF
WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec.
1. A new section is added
to chapter 48.22 RCW to read as follows:

(1) The legislature
finds that low-income persons have difficulty affording the mandatory liability
insurance required under chapter 46.30 RCW. Some of these persons do not have
automobile liability insurance solely because the premium is significantly
higher, sometimes double, and therefore unaffordable to them, because they previously
have not had automobile insurance, or have not had automobile insurance in the
previous year or two. The legislature intends to enable and encourage these
persons to obtain automobile insurance and develop a history of having
automobile insurance so that the premium is and continues to be affordable.
The legislature intends to accomplish this by equitably apportioning, among
insurers required to participate in the assigned risk plan, coverage for up to
two years for low-income persons without insurance as if they had a history of
having automobile insurance.

(2)(a) The commissioner
shall create a plan under RCW 48.22.020 to provide the minimum mandatory
automobile liability coverages required under chapter 46.30 RCW to low-income
persons who have not had automobile insurance during the prior year at the
premium level that would apply if the person had prior continuous automobile
insurance coverage. The policy shall have a term of one year, renewable for
one additional year. The plan shall provide a premium financing arrangement
that allows the premium to be paid in monthly installments.

(b) For purposes of
this section, "low-income person" means a person in a household with
a gross annual household income that does not exceed one hundred fifty percent
of the federal poverty level.

(c) The
policy shall cover the person named in the policy, and to the same extent that
insurance is provided to the named insured, any other person using the
automobile with permission, express or implied.

--- END ---