BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF
WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec.
1. A new section is added
to chapter 4.24 RCW to read as follows:

(1) Except as provided
in subsection (2) of this section, a volunteer of a nonprofit organization or
governmental entity shall not be personally liable for harm caused by an act or
omission of the volunteer on behalf of the organization or entity if:

(a) The volunteer was
acting within the scope of the volunteer's responsibilities in the nonprofit
organization or governmental entity at the time of the act or omission;

(b) If appropriate or
required, the volunteer was properly licensed, certified, or authorized by the
appropriate authorities for the activities or practice, where the activities
were or practice was undertaken within the scope of the volunteer's responsibilities
in the nonprofit organization or governmental entity;

(c) The harm was not
caused by willful or criminal misconduct, gross negligence, reckless
misconduct, or a conscious, flagrant indifference to the rights or safety of
the individual harmed by the volunteer;

(d) The harm was not
caused by the volunteer operating a motor vehicle, vessel, aircraft, or other
vehicle for which the state requires the operator or the owner of the vehicle,
craft, or vessel to either possess an operator's license or maintain insurance;
and

(e) The nonprofit
organization carries public liability insurance covering the organization's
liability for harm caused to others for which it is directly or vicariously
liable of not less than the following amounts:

(i) For organizations
with gross revenues of less than twenty-five thousand dollars, at least fifty
thousand dollars due to the bodily injury or death of one person or at least
one hundred thousand dollars due to the bodily injury or death of two or more
persons;

(ii) For organizations
with gross revenues of twenty-five thousand dollars or more but less than one
hundred thousand dollars, at least one hundred thousand dollars due to the
bodily injury or death of one person or at least two hundred thousand dollars due
to the bodily injury or death of two or more persons;

(iii) For organizations
with gross revenues of one hundred thousand dollars or more, at least five
hundred thousand dollars due to bodily injury or death.

(2) Nothing in this
section shall be construed to affect any civil action brought by any nonprofit
organization or any governmental entity against any volunteer of the
organization or entity.

(3) Nothing in this
section shall be construed to affect the liability, or vicarious liability, of
any nonprofit organization or governmental entity with respect to harm caused
to any person, including harm caused by the negligence of a volunteer.

(4) Nothing in this
section shall be construed to apply to the emergency workers registered in
accordance with chapter 38.52 RCW nor to the related volunteer organizations to
which they may belong.

(5) The definitions in
this subsection apply throughout this section unless the context clearly
requires otherwise.

(a) "Economic
loss" means any pecuniary loss resulting from harm, including the loss of
earnings or other benefits related to employment, medical expense loss,
replacement services loss, loss due to death, burial costs, and loss of
business or employment opportunities.

(b) "Harm"
includes physical, nonphysical, economic, and noneconomic losses.

(c) "Noneconomic
loss" means loss for physical and emotional pain, suffering,
inconvenience, physical impairment, mental anguish, disfigurement, loss of
enjoyment of life, loss of society and companionship, loss of consortium other
than loss of domestic service, hedonic damages, injury to reputation, and all
other nonpecuniary losses of any kind or nature.

(d) "Nonprofit
organization" means: (i) Any organization described in section 501(c)(3)
of the internal revenue code of 1986 (26 U.S.C. Sec. 501(c)(3)) and exempt from
tax under section 501(a) of the internal revenue code; (ii) any not-for-profit
organization that is organized and conducted for public benefit and operated
primarily for charitable, civic, educational, religious, welfare, or health
purposes; or (iii) any organization described in section 501(c)(14)(A) of the
internal revenue code of 1986 (26 U.S.C. Sec. 501(c)(14)(A)) and exempt from
tax under section 501(a) of the internal revenue code.

(e)
"Volunteer" means an individual performing services for a nonprofit
organization or a governmental entity who does not receive compensation, other
than reasonable reimbursement or allowance for expenses actually incurred, or
any other thing of value, in excess of five hundred dollars per year.
"Volunteer" includes a volunteer serving as a director, officer,
trustee, or direct service volunteer.

--- END ---