BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF
WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1. RCW 28A.150.305 and 1997
c 265 s 6 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) The board of
directors of school districts may contract with alternative educational service
providers for eligible students. Alternative educational service providers
that the school district may contract with include, but are not limited to:

(a) Other schools;

(b) Alternative
education programs not operated by the school district;

(c) Education centers;

(d) Skills centers;

(e) The Washington
national guard youth challenge program;

(f) Dropout
prevention programs; or

(((f))) (g)
Other public or private organizations, excluding sectarian or religious
organizations.

(2) Eligible students
include students who are likely to be expelled or who are enrolled in the
school district but have been suspended, are academically at risk, or who have
been subject to repeated disciplinary actions due to behavioral problems.

(3) If a school
district board of directors chooses to initiate specialized programs for
students at risk of expulsion or who are failing academically by contracting
out with alternative educational service providers identified in subsection (1)
of this section, the school district board of directors and the organization
must specify the specific learning standards that students are expected to
achieve. Placement of the student shall be jointly determined by the school
district, the student's parent or legal guardian, and the alternative
educational service provider.

(4) For the purpose of
this section, the superintendent of public instruction shall adopt rules for
reporting and documenting enrollment. Students may reenter at the grade level
appropriate to the student's ability. Students who are sixteen years of age or
older may take the GED test.

(5) The board of directors
of school districts may require that students who would otherwise be suspended
or expelled attend schools or programs listed in subsection (1) of this section
as a condition of continued enrollment in the school district.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
2. A new section is added
to chapter 28A.150 RCW to read as follows:

Basic and nonbasic
education funding, including applicable vocational entitlements and special
education program money, generated under this chapter and under state
appropriations acts shall be allocated directly to the military department for
a national guard youth challenge program for students earning high school
graduation credit under RCW 28A.305.170. Funding shall be provided based on
statewide average rates for basic education, special education, categorical,
and block grant programs as determined by the office of the superintendent of
public instruction. The monthly full-time equivalent enrollment reported for
students enrolled in the national guard youth challenge program shall be based
on one full-time equivalent for every one hundred student hours of scheduled
instruction eligible for high school graduation credit. The office of the
superintendent of public instruction, in consultation with the military
department, shall adopt such rules as are necessary to implement this section.

Sec. 3. RCW 28A.305.170 and 1975
1st ex.s. c 262 s 1 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) In addition
to any other powers and duties as provided by law, the state board of education
shall adopt rules ((and regulations)) governing and authorizing the
acceptance of national guard high school career training and the national
guard youth challenge program in lieu of either required high school credits
or elective high school credits.

(2) With the
exception of students enrolled in the national guard youth challenge program, students
enrolled in such national guard programs shall be considered enrolled in the
common school last attended preceding enrollment in such national guard
program.

(3) The
board shall adopt rules to ensure that students who successfully complete the
national guard youth challenge program are granted an appropriate number of
high school credits, based on the students' levels of academic proficiency as
measured by the program.

---
END ---