BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF
WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec.
1. A new section is added
to chapter 10.95 RCW to read as follows:

(1) Until July 1, 2003,
the sentence of death for anyone sentenced under RCW 10.95.030(2) shall be
stayed.

(2) A death penalty
task force is hereby created for the purpose of conducting a review of the
existing statutes and court rules to determine the following:

(a) The adequacy of the
counsel and resources provided defendants in capital offense cases;

(b) The uniformity of
decision making by prosecuting attorneys in terms of charging defendants with
aggravated first degree murder and the criteria in such decisions;

(c) The impact of race,
ethnicity, gender, and economic status on the likelihood of a defendant being
charged with aggravated first degree murder; and

(d) Whether there are
revisions to existing statutes and court rules which, if implemented, would
decrease the likelihood of an inappropriate imposition of the death penalty.

(3) The task force
shall consist of eleven members. The membership shall be appointed as follows:

(a) Two members
appointed by the chief justice of the state supreme court;

(b) Two members
appointed by the president of the senate;

(c) Two members
appointed by the speaker of the house of representatives;

(d) Two members appointed
by the governor;

(e) Three members
appointed by the president of the Washington state bar association. Not more
than one member shall be a current or former prosecuting attorney. Not more
than one member shall be an attorney whose practice is primarily criminal
defense and who has experience in death penalty cases.

(4) The task force may
conduct meetings, select officers, and prescribe rules of procedure. The task
force shall cooperate, act, and function with legislative committees and
executive agencies as necessary to complete its business.

(5) Members of the task
force shall serve without additional compensation, but must be reimbursed for
their travel expenses, in accordance with RCW 43.03.050 and 44.04.120, incurred
while attending meetings of the task force, engaged on other task force
business authorized by the task force, or going to and coming from task force
meetings.

(6) The task force
shall make a report, together with any recommendations, to the legislature,
governor, and supreme court not later than January 1, 2003.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
2. (1) The sum of fifty
thousand dollars, or as much thereof as may be necessary, is appropriated for
the fiscal year ending June 30, 2001, from the general fund to the office of
the administrator for the courts for the purposes of providing staffing and
support to the death penalty task force.

(2) The sum of one
hundred thousand dollars, or as much thereof as may be necessary, is
appropriated for the fiscal year ending June 30, 2002, from the general fund to
the office of the administrator for the courts for the purposes of providing
staffing and support to the death penalty task force.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 3. Section 1 of this act
expires July 1, 2003.

---
END ---