BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF
WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1. RCW 46.52.020 and 2000 c
66 s 1 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) A driver of any
vehicle involved in an accident resulting in the injury to or death of any
person or involving striking the body of a deceased person shall
immediately stop such vehicle at the scene of such accident or as close thereto
as possible but shall then forthwith return to, and in every event remain at,
the scene of such accident until he or she has fulfilled the requirements of
subsection (3) of this section; every such stop shall be made without
obstructing traffic more than is necessary.

(2) The driver of any
vehicle involved in an accident resulting only in damage to a vehicle which is
driven or attended by any person or damage to other property shall immediately
stop such vehicle at the scene of such accident or as close thereto as possible
and shall forthwith return to, and in any event shall remain at, the scene of
such accident until he or she has fulfilled the requirements of subsection (3)
of this section; every such stop shall be made without obstructing traffic more
than is necessary.

(3) Unless otherwise
provided in subsection (7) of this section the driver of any vehicle involved
in an accident resulting in injury to or death of any person, or involving
striking the body of a deceased person, or resulting in damage to any
vehicle which is driven or attended by any person or damage to other property
shall give his or her name, address, insurance company, insurance policy
number, and vehicle license number and shall exhibit his or her vehicle
driver's license to any person struck or injured or the driver or any occupant
of, or any person attending, any such vehicle collided with and shall render to
any person injured in such accident reasonable assistance, including the carrying
or the making of arrangements for the carrying of such person to a physician or
hospital for medical treatment if it is apparent that such treatment is
necessary or if such carrying is requested by the injured person or on his or
her behalf. Under no circumstances shall the rendering of assistance or other
compliance with the provisions of this subsection be evidence of the liability
of any driver for such accident.

(4)(a) Any driver
covered by the provisions of subsection (1) of this section failing to stop or
comply with any of the requirements of subsection (3) of this section in the
case of an accident resulting in death is guilty of a class B felony and, upon
conviction, is punishable according to chapter 9A.20 RCW.

(b) Any driver covered
by the provisions of subsection (1) of this section failing to stop or comply
with any of the requirements of subsection (3) of this section in the case of
an accident resulting in injury is guilty of a class C felony and, upon
conviction, is punishable according to chapter 9A.20 RCW.

(c) Any driver
covered by the provisions of subsection (1) of this section failing to stop or
comply with any of the requirements of subsection (3) of this section in the
case of an accident involving striking the body of a deceased person is guilty
of a gross misdemeanor.

(d) This
subsection shall not apply to any person injured or incapacitated by such
accident to the extent of being physically incapable of complying with this
section.

(5) Any driver covered
by the provisions of subsection (2) of this section failing to stop or to
comply with any of the requirements of subsection (3) of this section under
said circumstances shall be guilty of a gross misdemeanor: PROVIDED, That this
provision shall not apply to any person injured or incapacitated by such
accident to the extent of being physically incapable of complying herewith.

(6) The license or
permit to drive or any nonresident privilege to drive of any person convicted
under this section or any local ordinance consisting of substantially the same
language as this section of failure to stop and give information or render aid
following an accident with any vehicle driven or attended by any person shall
be revoked by the department.

(7) If
none of the persons specified are in condition to receive the information to
which they otherwise would be entitled under subsection (3) of this section,
and no police officer is present, the driver of any vehicle involved in such
accident after fulfilling all other requirements of subsections (1) and (3) of
this section insofar as possible on his or her part to be performed, shall
forthwith report such accident to the nearest office of the duly authorized police
authority and submit thereto the information specified in subsection (3) of
this section.

--- END ---