BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF
WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1. RCW 71.24.015 and 1999 c
214 s 7 are each amended to read as follows:

It is the intent of the
legislature to establish a community mental health program which shall help
people experiencing mental illness to retain a respected and productive
position in the community. This will be accomplished through programs which
provide for:

(1) Access to mental
health services for adults of the state who are acutely mentally ill,
chronically mentally ill, or seriously disturbed and children of the state who
are acutely mentally ill, severely emotionally disturbed, or seriously disturbed,
which services recognize the special needs of underserved populations,
including minorities, children, the elderly, disabled, and low-income persons.
Access to mental health services shall not be limited by a person's history of
confinement in a state, federal, or local correctional facility. It is also
the purpose of this chapter to promote the early identification of mentally ill
children and to ensure that they receive the mental health care and treatment
which is appropriate to their developmental level. This care should improve
home, school, and community functioning, maintain children in a safe and
nurturing home environment, and should enable treatment decisions to be made in
response to clinical needs in accordance with sound professional judgment while
also recognizing parents' rights to participate in treatment decisions for
their children;

(2) Accountability of efficient
and effective services through state of the art outcome and performance
measures and statewide standards for monitoring client and system
outcomes, performance, and reporting of information. These processes
shall be designed so as to maximize the use of available resources for direct
care of people with a mental illness;

(3) Minimum service
delivery standards;

(4) Priorities for the
use of available resources for the care of the mentally ill consistent with
the priorities defined in the statute;

(5) Coordination of
services within the department, including those divisions within the department
that provide services to children, between the department and the office of the
superintendent of public instruction, and among state mental hospitals, county
authorities, community mental health services, and other support services,
which shall to the maximum extent feasible also include the families of the
mentally ill, and other service providers; and

(6) Coordination of
services aimed at reducing duplication in service delivery and promoting
complementary services among all entities that provide mental health services
to adults and children.

It is the policy of the
state to encourage the provision of a full range of treatment and
rehabilitation services in the state for mental disorders. The legislature
intends to encourage the development of county-based and county-managed mental
health services with adequate local flexibility to assure eligible people in
need of care access to the least-restrictive treatment alternative appropriate
to their needs, and the availability of treatment components to assure
continuity of care. To this end, counties are encouraged to enter into joint
operating agreements with other counties to form regional systems of care which
integrate planning, administration, and service delivery duties assigned to
counties under chapters 71.05 and 71.24 RCW to consolidate administration,
reduce administrative layering, and reduce administrative costs.

It is further the
intent of the legislature to integrate the provision of services to provide
continuity of care through all phases of treatment. To this end the legislature
intends to promote active engagement with mentally ill persons and
collaboration between families and service providers.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
2. A new section is added
to chapter 71.24 RCW to read as follows:

The department shall
operate the community mental health service delivery system authorized under
this chapter within the following constraints:

(1) The full amount of
federal funds for mental health services, plus qualifying state expenditures as
appropriated in the biennial operating budget, shall be appropriated to the
department each year in the biennial appropriations act to carry out the
provisions of the community mental health service delivery system authorized in
this chapter.

(2) The department may
expend funds defined in subsection (1) of this section in any manner that will
effectively accomplish the outcome measures defined in section 4 of this act.
No more than twenty percent of the amount provided in subsection (1) of this
section may be spent cumulatively for administrative purposes by the
department, regional support networks, and providers. For the purpose of this
subsection, "administrative purposes" does not include expenditures
for information technology and computerization needed for tracking and
monitoring required under RCW 71.24.035.

(3) The department
shall implement strategies that accomplish the outcome measures identified in
section 4 of this act that are within the funding constraints in this section.
The department may transfer appropriation authority between funding categories
within the health and rehabilitation services administration, the children and
family services administration, the aging and adult services administration,
and the medical assistance administration in order to carry out the
requirements of this subsection.

(4) The department
shall monitor expenditures against the appropriation levels provided for in
subsection (1) of this section.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
3. A new section is added
to chapter 71.24 RCW to read as follows:

It is the intent of the
legislature that the community mental health service delivery system focus on
maintaining mentally ill individuals in the community. The program shall be
evaluated and managed through a limited number of performance measures designed
to hold each regional support network accountable for program success.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
4. A new section is added
to chapter 71.24 RCW to read as follows:

(1) The department, in
collaboration with a work group made up of consumers, service providers, and
representatives of regional support networks shall develop performance measures
for use in evaluating and managing the community mental health service delivery
system authorized under this chapter. The performance measures shall be
reviewed, and updated as needed, by January 15th of each odd-numbered year.
The performance measures shall be consistent with the provisions of RCW
71.24.405(3) which may include but are not limited to:

(a) Access to services;

(b) Quality and
appropriateness of care;

(c) Outcome measures;
including, but not limited to:

(i) Consumer change
over time;

(ii) Consumer
perception of hope for the future;

(iii) Percent of
consumers who have safe and stable housing;

(iv) Percent of adults
employed for one or more days in the last thirty days;

(v) Percent of
consumers without a jail or detention stay;

(vi) Percent of
available school days attended in the past thirty days;

(vii) Percent of
consumers without a psychiatric hospitalization; and

(d) Structure and plan
management.

(2) The department
shall require that service providers and regional support networks collect
uniform performance measure information and report it to the department
regularly. The department shall develop benchmarks that compare performance
measure information from all regional support networks and providers to provide
a clear indication of the most effective regional support networks and
providers. Benchmark information shall be published quarterly and provided to
the legislature, the governor, regional support networks, and all providers of
mental health services.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
5. A new section is added
to chapter 71.24 RCW to read as follows:

Every regional support
network and mental health services provider shall be evaluated using the
criteria in section 4 of this act.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
6. A new section is added
to chapter 71.24 RCW to read as follows:

The department shall
provide a report to the appropriate committees of the legislature on the
development, implementation, and achievement of the performance measures by
regional support networks and service providers on an annual basis, no later
than June 30th of each year, beginning in 2002. The report shall include how
the department is using the outcome measure information obtained under section
4 of this act to manage the community mental health service delivery system.

Sec. 7. RCW 71.24.025 and 1999 c
10 s 2 are each amended to read as follows:

Unless the context
clearly requires otherwise, the definitions in this section apply throughout
this chapter.

(1) "Acutely
mentally ill" means a condition which is limited to a short-term severe
crisis episode of:

(a) A mental disorder
as defined in RCW 71.05.020 or, in the case of a child, as defined in RCW
71.34.020;

(b) Being gravely
disabled as defined in RCW 71.05.020 or, in the case of a child, a gravely
disabled minor as defined in RCW 71.34.020; or

(c) Presenting a
likelihood of serious harm as defined in RCW 71.05.020 or, in the case of a
child, as defined in RCW 71.34.020.

(2) "Available
resources" means funds appropriated for the purpose of providing community
mental health programs under RCW 71.24.045, federal funds, except those
provided according to Title XIX of the Social Security Act, and state funds
appropriated under this chapter or chapter 71.05 RCW by the legislature during
any biennium for the purpose of providing residential services, resource
management services, community support services, and other mental health
services. This does not include funds appropriated for the purpose of
operating and administering the state psychiatric hospitals, except as
negotiated according to RCW 71.24.300(1)(((d))) (e).

(3) "Child"
means a person under the age of eighteen years.

(4) "Chronically
mentally ill adult" means an adult who has a mental disorder and meets at
least one of the following criteria:

(a) Has undergone two
or more episodes of hospital care for a mental disorder within the preceding
two years; or

(b) Has experienced a
continuous psychiatric hospitalization or residential treatment exceeding six
months' duration within the preceding year; or

(c) Has been unable to
engage in any substantial gainful activity by reason of any mental disorder
which has lasted for a continuous period of not less than twelve months.
"Substantial gainful activity" shall be defined by the department by
rule consistent with Public Law 92‑603, as amended.

(5) "Community
mental health program" means all mental health services, activities, or
programs using available resources.

(6) "Community mental
health service delivery system" means public or private agencies that
provide services specifically to persons with mental disorders as defined under
RCW 71.05.020 and receive funding from public sources.

(7) "Community
support services" means services authorized, planned, and coordinated
through resource management services including, at ((least)) a
minimum, assessment, diagnosis, emergency crisis intervention available
twenty-four hours, seven days a week, prescreening determinations for mentally ill
persons being considered for placement in nursing homes as required by federal
law, screening for patients being considered for admission to residential
services, diagnosis and treatment for acutely mentally ill and severely
emotionally disturbed children discovered under screening through the federal
Title XIX early and periodic screening, diagnosis, and treatment program,
investigation, legal, and other nonresidential services under chapter 71.05
RCW, case management services, psychiatric treatment including medication
supervision, counseling, psychotherapy, assuring transfer of relevant patient
information between service providers, and other services determined by
regional support networks((, and maintenance of a patient tracking system
for chronically mentally ill adults and severely emotionally disturbed children)).

(8) "County
authority" means the board of county commissioners, county council, or
county executive having authority to establish a community mental health
program, or two or more of the county authorities specified in this subsection
which have entered into an agreement to provide a community mental health
program.

(9)
"Department" means the department of social and health services.

(10) "Licensed
service provider" means an entity licensed according to this chapter or
chapter 71.05 RCW or an entity deemed to meet state minimum standards as a
result of accreditation by a recognized behavioral health accrediting body
that meets state minimum standards or individuals licensed under chapter 18.57,
18.71, 18.83, or 18.79 RCW, as it applies to registered nurses and advanced
registered nurse practitioners.

(11) "Mental
health services" means all services provided by regional support networks
and other services provided by the state for the mentally ill.

(12) "Mentally ill
persons" and "the mentally ill" mean persons and conditions
defined in subsections (1), (4), (17), and (18) of this section.

(13) "Regional
support network" means a county authority or group of county authorities
recognized by the secretary that enter into joint operating agreements to
contract with the secretary pursuant to this chapter.

(14) "Residential
services" means a complete range of residences and supports authorized by
resource management services and which may involve a facility, a distinct part
thereof, or services which support community living, for acutely mentally ill
persons, chronically mentally ill adults, severely emotionally disturbed
children, or seriously disturbed adults determined by the regional support
network to be at risk of becoming acutely or chronically mentally ill. The
services shall include at least evaluation and treatment services as defined in
chapter 71.05 RCW, acute crisis respite care, long-term adaptive and
rehabilitative care, and supervised and supported living services, and shall
also include any residential services developed to service mentally ill persons
in nursing homes. Residential services for children in out-of-home placements
related to their mental disorder shall not include the costs of food and
shelter, except for children's long-term residential facilities existing prior
to January 1, 1991.

(15) "Resource
management services" mean the planning, coordination, and authorization of
residential services and community support services administered pursuant to an
individual service plan for: (a) Acutely mentally ill adults and children; (b)
chronically mentally ill adults; (c) severely emotionally disturbed children;
or (d) seriously disturbed adults determined solely by a regional support
network to be at risk of becoming acutely or chronically mentally ill. Such
planning, coordination, and authorization shall include mental health screening
for children eligible under the federal Title XIX early and periodic screening,
diagnosis, and treatment program. Resource management services include seven
day a week, twenty-four hour a day availability of information regarding
mentally ill adults' and children's enrollment in services and their individual
service plan to county-designated mental health professionals, evaluation and
treatment facilities, and others as determined by the regional support network.

(16)
"Secretary" means the secretary of social and health services.

(17) "Seriously
disturbed person" means a person who:

(a) Is gravely disabled
or presents a likelihood of serious harm to himself or herself or others, or to
the property of others, as a result of a mental disorder as defined in chapter
71.05 RCW;

(b) Has been on
conditional release status, or under a less restrictive alternative order, at
some time during the preceding two years from an evaluation and treatment
facility or a state mental health hospital;

(c) Has a mental
disorder which causes major impairment in several areas of daily living;

(d) Exhibits suicidal
preoccupation or attempts; or

(e) Is a child
diagnosed by a mental health professional, as defined in chapter 71.34 RCW, as
experiencing a mental disorder which is clearly interfering with the child's
functioning in family or school or with peers or is clearly interfering with
the child's personality development and learning.

(18) "Severely
emotionally disturbed child" means a child who has been determined by the
regional support network to be experiencing a mental disorder as defined in
chapter 71.34 RCW, including those mental disorders that result in a behavioral
or conduct disorder, that is clearly interfering with the child's functioning
in family or school or with peers and who meets at least one of the following
criteria:

(a) Has undergone
inpatient treatment or placement outside of the home related to a mental
disorder within the last two years;

(b) Has undergone
involuntary treatment under chapter 71.34 RCW within the last two years;

(c) Is currently served
by at least one of the following child-serving systems: Juvenile justice,
child-protection/welfare, special education, or developmental disabilities;

(d) Is at risk of
escalating maladjustment due to:

(i) Chronic family
dysfunction involving a mentally ill or inadequate caretaker;

(ii) Changes in
custodial adult;

(iii) Going to,
residing in, or returning from any placement outside of the home, for example,
psychiatric hospital, short-term inpatient, residential treatment, group or
foster home, or a correctional facility;

(iv) Subject to
repeated physical abuse or neglect;

(v) Drug or alcohol
abuse; or

(vi) Homelessness.

(19) "State
minimum standards" means minimum requirements established by rules adopted
by the secretary and necessary to implement this chapter for: (a) Delivery of
mental health services; (b) licensed service providers for the provision of mental
health services; (c) residential services; and (d) community support services
and resource management services.

(20) "Tribal
authority," for the purposes of this section and RCW 71.24.300 only,
means: The federally recognized Indian tribes and the major Indian
organizations recognized by the secretary insofar as these organizations do not
have a financial relationship with any regional support network that would
present a conflict of interest.

Sec. 8. RCW 71.24.030 and 1999 c
10 s 3 are each amended to read as follows:

The secretary is
authorized to make grants to and/or purchase services from counties or
combinations of counties in the establishment and operation of community mental
health programs.

Sec. 9. RCW 71.24.035 and 1999 c
10 s 4 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) The department is
designated as the state mental health authority.

(2) The secretary ((may))
shall provide for public, client, and licensed service provider participation
in developing the state mental health program, developing contracts with
regional support networks, and any waiver request to the federal government
under medicaid.

(3) The secretary shall
provide for participation in developing the state mental health program for
children and other underserved populations, by including representatives on any
committee established to provide oversight to the state mental health program.

(4) The secretary shall
be designated as the county authority if a county fails to meet state minimum
standards or refuses to exercise responsibilities under RCW 71.24.045.

(5) The secretary
shall:

(a) Develop a biennial
state mental health program that incorporates county biennial needs assessments
and county mental health service plans and state services for mentally ill
adults and children. The secretary may also develop a six-year state mental
health plan;

(b) Assure that any regional
or county community mental health program provides access to treatment for
the county's residents in the following order of priority: (i) The acutely
mentally ill; (ii) chronically mentally ill adults and severely emotionally
disturbed children; and (iii) the seriously disturbed. Such programs shall
provide:

(A) Outpatient
services;

(B) Emergency care
services for twenty-four hours per day;

(C) Day treatment for
mentally ill persons which includes training in basic living and social skills,
supported work, vocational rehabilitation, and day activities. Such services
may include therapeutic treatment. In the case of a child, day treatment
includes age-appropriate basic living and social skills, educational and
prevocational services, day activities, and therapeutic treatment;

(D) Screening for
patients being considered for admission to state mental health facilities to
determine the appropriateness of admission;

(E) Employment
services, which may include supported employment, transitional work, placement
in competitive employment, and other work-related services, that result in mentally
ill persons becoming engaged in meaningful and gainful full or part-time work.
Other sources of funding such as the division of vocational rehabilitation may
be utilized by the secretary to maximize federal funding and provide for
integration of services;

(F) Consultation and
education services; and

(G) Community support
services;

(c) Develop and adopt
rules establishing state minimum standards for the delivery of mental health
services pursuant to RCW 71.24.037 including, but not limited to:

(i) Licensed service
providers. The secretary shall provide for deeming of compliance with state
minimum standards for those entities accredited by recognized behavioral health
accrediting bodies;

(ii) Regional support
networks; and

(iii) ((Residential
and)) Inpatient services, evaluation and treatment services and
facilities under chapter 71.05 RCW, resource management services, and community
support services;

(d) Assure that the
special needs of minorities, the elderly, disabled, children, and low-income persons
are met within the priorities established in this section;

(e) Establish a
standard contract or contracts, consistent with state minimum standards, which
shall be used ((by the)) in contracting with regional support
networks or counties. The standard contract shall include a maximum
fund balance, which shall not exceed ten percent;

(f) Establish, to the
extent possible, a standardized auditing procedure which minimizes paperwork
requirements of county authorities and licensed service providers. The
audit procedure shall focus on the outcomes of service and not the processes
for accomplishing them;

(g) Develop and
maintain an information system to be used by the state, counties, and regional
support networks that includes a tracking method which allows the department
and regional support networks to identify mental health clients' participation
in any mental health service or public program on an immediate basis. The
information system shall not include individual patient's case history files.
Confidentiality of client information and records shall be maintained as
provided in this chapter and in RCW 71.05.390, 71.05.400, 71.05.410, 71.05.420,
71.05.430, and 71.05.440. The design of the system and the data elements to
be collected shall be reviewed each biennium by a committee appointed by the
secretary and representing the department, regional support networks, service
providers, consumers, and advocates. The data elements shall be designed to
provide information that is needed to measure performance and achieve the
service outcomes identified in section 4 of this act;

(h) License service
providers who meet state minimum standards;

(i) Certify regional
support networks that meet state minimum standards;

(j) Periodically ((inspect))
monitor the compliance of certified regional support networks and their
network of licensed service providers for compliance with the contract
between the department and the regional support network at reasonable times
and in a reasonable manner;

(k) Fix fees to be paid
by evaluation and treatment centers to the secretary for the required
inspections;

(l) Monitor and audit
counties, regional support networks, and licensed service providers as needed
to assure compliance with contractual agreements authorized by this chapter;
and

(m) Adopt such rules as
are necessary to implement the department's responsibilities under this
chapter. The secretary may not adopt rules that divert resources from the
direct care of people with a mental illness unless they are directly required
for the health and safety of consumers, the implementation of this chapter, or
other state or federal requirements.

(6) The secretary shall
use available resources only for regional support networks.

(7) Each certified
regional support network and licensed service provider shall file with the
secretary, on request, such data, statistics, schedules, and information as the
secretary reasonably requires. A certified regional support network or
licensed service provider which, without good cause, fails to furnish any data,
statistics, schedules, or information as requested, or files fraudulent reports
thereof, may have its certification or license revoked or suspended.

(8) The secretary may
suspend, revoke, limit, or restrict a certification or license, or refuse to
grant a certification or license for failure to conform to: (a) The law; (b)
applicable rules and regulations; (c) applicable standards; or (d) state
minimum standards.

(9) The superior court
may restrain any regional support network or service provider from operating
without certification or a license or any other violation of this section. The
court may also review, pursuant to procedures contained in chapter 34.05 RCW,
any denial, suspension, limitation, restriction, or revocation of certification
or license, and grant other relief required to enforce the provisions of this
chapter.

(10) Upon petition by
the secretary, and after hearing held upon reasonable notice to the facility,
the superior court may issue a warrant to an officer or employee of the
secretary authorizing him or her to enter at reasonable times, and examine the
records, books, and accounts of any regional support network or service
provider refusing to consent to inspection or examination by the authority.

(11) Notwithstanding
the existence or pursuit of any other remedy, the secretary may file an action
for an injunction or other process against any person or governmental unit to
restrain or prevent the establishment, conduct, or operation of a regional
support network or service provider without certification or a license under
this chapter.

(12) The standards for certification
of evaluation and treatment facilities shall include standards relating to
maintenance of good physical and mental health and other services to be
afforded persons pursuant to this chapter and chapters 71.05 and 71.34 RCW, and
shall otherwise assure the effectuation of the purposes of these chapters.

(13)(a) The department,
in consultation with affected parties, shall establish a distribution formula
that reflects county needs assessments based on the number of persons who are
acutely mentally ill, chronically mentally ill, severely emotionally disturbed
children, and seriously disturbed. The formula shall take into consideration
the impact on counties of demographic factors in counties which result in
concentrations of priority populations as set forth in subsection (5)(b) of
this section. These factors shall include the population concentrations
resulting from commitments under chapters 71.05 and 71.34 RCW to state
psychiatric hospitals, as well as concentration in urban areas, at border crossings
at state boundaries, and other significant demographic and workload factors.

(b) The formula shall
also include a projection of the funding allocations that will result for each
county, which specifies allocations according to priority populations,
including the allocation for services to children and other underserved
populations.

(14) The secretary
shall assume all duties assigned to the nonparticipating counties under
chapters 71.05, 71.34, and 71.24 RCW. Such responsibilities shall include those
which would have been assigned to the nonparticipating counties under regional
support networks.

The regional support
networks, or the secretary's assumption of all responsibilities under chapters
71.05, 71.34, and 71.24 RCW, shall be included in all state and federal plans
affecting the state mental health program including at least those required by
this chapter, the medicaid program, and P.L. 99‑660. Nothing in these
plans shall be inconsistent with the intent and requirements of this chapter.

(15) The secretary
shall:

(a) Disburse funds for
the regional support networks within sixty days of approval of the biennial
contract. The department must either approve or reject the biennial contract
within sixty days of receipt.

(b) Enter into biennial
contracts with regional support networks. The contracts shall be consistent
with available resources. No contract shall be approved that does not include
progress toward meeting the goals of this chapter by taking responsibility
for: (i) Short-term commitments; (ii) residential care; and (iii) emergency
response systems.

(c) Allocate one
hundred percent of available resources to the regional support networks in
accordance with subsection (13) of this section.

(d) Notify regional
support networks of their allocation of available resources at least sixty days
prior to the start of a new biennial contract period.

(e) Deny funding
allocations to regional support networks based solely upon formal findings of
noncompliance with the terms of the regional support network's contract with
the department. Written notice and at least thirty days for corrective action
must precede any such action. In such cases, regional support networks shall
have full rights to appeal under chapter 34.05 RCW.

(((f) Identify in its
departmental biennial operating and capital budget requests the funds requested
by regional support networks to implement their responsibilities under this
chapter.))

(16) The department, in
cooperation with the state congressional delegation, shall actively seek
waivers of federal requirements and such modifications of federal regulations
as are necessary to allow federal medicaid reimbursement for services provided
by free-standing evaluation and treatment facilities certified under chapter
71.05 RCW. It is the intent of the legislature that the department take
great care to avoid, in the processing of a waiver request, creating
requirements that divert available resources from direct care. The
department shall periodically report its efforts to the ((health care and
corrections)) appropriate committees of the senate and the ((human
services committee of the)) house of representatives.

(((17) The secretary
shall establish a task force to examine the recruitment, training, and
compensation of qualified mental health professionals in the community, which
shall include the advantages and disadvantages of establishing a training
academy, loan forgiveness program, or educational stipends offered in exchange
for commitments of employment in mental health.))

Sec. 10. RCW 71.24.037 and 1999 c
10 s 5 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) The secretary shall
by rule establish state minimum standards for licensed service providers and
services.

(2) Minimum standards
for licensed service providers shall, at a minimum, establish: Qualifications
for staff providing services directly to mentally ill persons, the intended
result of each service, and the rights and responsibilities of persons receiving
mental health services pursuant to this chapter. The secretary shall
provide for deeming of licensed service providers as meeting state minimum
standards as a result of accreditation by a recognized behavioral health
accrediting body.

(3) ((Minimum standards
for residential services shall be based on clients' functional abilities and
not solely on their diagnoses, limited to health and safety, staff
qualifications, and program outcomes. Minimum standards for residential
services shall be developed in collaboration with consumers, families,
counties, regulators, and residential providers serving the mentally ill. The
minimum standards shall encourage the development of broad-range residential
programs, including integrated housing and cross-systems programs where
appropriate, and shall not unnecessarily restrict programming flexibility.

(4))) Minimum standards for community support
services and resource management services shall include at least qualifications
for resource management services, client tracking systems, and the transfer of
patient information between service providers.

Sec. 11. RCW 71.24.045 and 1992 c
230 s 5 are each amended to read as follows:

The county authority
shall:

(1) Contract as needed
with licensed service providers. The county authority may, in the absence of a
licensed service provider entity, become a licensed service provider entity
pursuant to minimum standards required for licensing by the department for the
purpose of providing services not available from licensed service providers;

(2) Operate as a
licensed service provider if it deems that doing so is more efficient and cost
effective than contracting for services. When doing so, the county authority
shall comply with rules promulgated by the secretary that shall provide
measurements to determine when a county provided service is more efficient and
cost effective;

(3) Monitor and perform
biennial fiscal audits of licensed service providers who have contracted with
the county to provide services required by this chapter. The monitoring and
audits shall be performed by means of a formal process which insures that the
licensed service providers and professionals designated in this subsection meet
the terms of their contracts((, including the minimum standards of service
delivery as established by the department));

(4) Assure that the
special needs of minorities, the elderly, disabled, children, and low‑income
persons are met within the priorities established in this chapter;

(5) Maintain patient
tracking information in a central location as required for resource management
services and the department's information system;

(6) Use not more than
two percent of state‑appropriated community mental health funds, which
shall not include federal funds, to administer community mental health programs
under RCW 71.24.155: PROVIDED, That county authorities serving a county or
combination of counties whose population is one hundred twenty‑five
thousand or more may be entitled to sufficient state‑appropriated
community mental health funds to employ up to one full‑time employee or
the equivalent thereof in addition to the two percent limit established in this
subsection when such employee is providing staff services to a county mental
health advisory board;

(7) Coordinate services
for individuals who have received services through the community mental health
system and who become patients at a state mental hospital.

Sec. 12. RCW 71.24.049 and 1999 c
10 s 6 are each amended to read as follows:

By January
1st of each odd-numbered year, the ((county authority)) regional
support network shall identify: (1) The number of children in each
priority group, as defined by this chapter, who are receiving mental health
services funded in part or in whole under this chapter, (2) the amount of funds
under this chapter used for children's mental health services, (3) an estimate
of the number of unserved children in each priority group, and (4) the estimated
cost of serving these additional children and their families.

Sec. 13. RCW 71.24.155 and 1987 c
505 s 65 are each amended to read as follows:

Grants shall be made by
the department to ((counties)) regional support networks for
community mental health programs totaling not less than ninety-five percent of
available resources. The department may use up to forty percent of the
remaining five percent to provide community demonstration projects, including
early intervention or primary prevention programs for children, and the
remainder shall be for emergency needs and technical assistance under this
chapter.

Sec. 14. RCW 71.24.160 and 1989 c
205 s 7 are each amended to read as follows:

The ((county
authority)) regional support networks shall make satisfactory
showing to the secretary that state funds shall in no case be used to replace
local funds from any source being used to finance mental health services prior
to January 1, 1990.

Sec. 15. RCW 71.24.250 and 1982 c
204 s 14 are each amended to read as follows:

The ((county
authority)) regional support network may accept and expend gifts and
grants received from private, county, state, and federal sources.

Sec. 16. RCW 71.24.300 and 1999 c
214 s 8 and 1999 c 10 s 9 are each reenacted and amended to read as follows:

A county authority or a
group of county authorities whose combined population is no less than forty
thousand may enter into a joint operating agreement to form a regional support
network. Upon the request of a tribal authority or authorities within a
regional support network the joint operating agreement or the county authority
shall allow for the inclusion of the tribal authority to be represented as a
party to the regional support network. The roles and responsibilities of the
county and tribal authorities shall be determined by the terms of that
agreement including a determination of membership on the governing board and
advisory committees, the number of tribal representatives to be party to the
agreement, and the provisions of law and shall assure the provision of
culturally competent services to the tribes served. The state mental health
authority may not determine the roles and responsibilities of county
authorities as to each other under regional support networks by rule, except to
assure that all duties required of regional support networks are assigned and
that counties and the regional support network do not duplicate functions
and that a single authority has final responsibility for all available
resources and performance under the regional support network's contract with
the secretary.

(1) Regional support
networks shall submit an overall six‑year operating and capital plan,
timeline, and budget and submit progress reports and an updated two‑year
plan biennially thereafter, to assume within available resources all of the
following duties:

(a) Administer and
provide for the availability of all resource management services, residential
services, and community support services.

(b) Assume the
powers and duties of county authorities within its area as described in RCW
71.24.045 (1) through (7).

(c) Administer
and provide for the availability of all investigation, transportation, court‑related,
and other services provided by the state or counties pursuant to chapter 71.05
RCW.

(((c))) (d)
Provide within the boundaries of each regional support network evaluation and
treatment services for at least eighty‑five percent of persons detained
or committed for periods up to seventeen days according to chapter 71.05 RCW.
Regional support networks with populations of less than one hundred fifty
thousand may contract to purchase evaluation and treatment services from other
networks. Insofar as the original intent of serving persons in the community
is maintained, the secretary is authorized to approve exceptions on a
case-by-case basis to the requirement to provide evaluation and treatment
services within the boundaries of each regional support network. Such
exceptions are limited to contracts with neighboring or contiguous regions.

(((d))) (e)
Administer a portion of funds appropriated by the legislature to house mentally
ill persons in state institutions from counties within the boundaries of any
regional support network, with the exception of persons currently confined at,
or under the supervision of, a state mental hospital pursuant to chapter 10.77
RCW, and provide for the care of all persons needing evaluation and treatment
services for periods up to seventeen days according to chapter 71.05 RCW in
appropriate residential services, which may include state institutions. The
regional support networks shall reimburse the state for use of state
institutions at a rate equal to that assumed by the legislature when
appropriating funds for such care at state institutions during the biennium
when reimbursement occurs. The secretary shall submit a report to the
appropriate committees of the senate and house of representatives on the
efforts to implement this section by October 1, 2002. The duty of a state
hospital to accept persons for evaluation and treatment under chapter 71.05 RCW
is limited by the responsibilities assigned to regional support networks under
this section.

(((e))) (f)
Administer and provide for the availability of all other mental health
services, which shall include patient counseling, day treatment, consultation,
education services, employment services as defined in RCW 71.24.035, and mental
health services to children as provided in this chapter designed to achieve
the outcomes specified in section 4 of this act.

(((f))) (g)
Establish standards and procedures for reviewing individual service plans and
determining when that person may be discharged from resource management
services.

(2) Regional support
networks shall assume all duties assigned to county authorities by this chapter
and chapter 71.05 RCW.

(3) A regional support
network may request that any state‑owned land, building, facility, or
other capital asset which was ever purchased, deeded, given, or placed in trust
for the care of the mentally ill and which is within the boundaries of a
regional support network be made available to support the operations of the
regional support network. State agencies managing such capital assets shall
give first priority to requests for their use pursuant to this chapter.

(4) Each regional
support network shall appoint a mental health advisory board which shall review
and provide comments on plans and policies developed under this chapter. The
composition of the board shall be broadly representative of the demographic
character of the region and the mentally ill persons served therein. Length of
terms of board members shall be determined by the regional support network.

(5) Regional support
networks shall assume all duties specified in their plans and joint operating
agreements through biennial contractual agreements with the secretary. ((Such
contracts may include agreements to provide periods of stable community living
and work or other day activities for specific chronically mentally ill persons
who have completed commitments at state hospitals on ninety‑day or one
hundred eighty‑day civil commitments or who have been residents at state
hospitals for no less than one hundred eighty days within the previous year.
Periods of stable community living may involve acute care in local evaluation
and treatment facilities but may not involve use of state hospitals.))

(6) Counties or groups
of counties participating in a regional support network are not subject to RCW
71.24.045(6).

(7) ((As part of
each biennial plan, each regional support network shall establish and submit to
the state, procedures and agreements to assure access to sufficient additional
local evaluation and treatment facilities to meet the requirements of this
chapter while reducing short‑term admissions to state hospitals. These
shall be commitments to construct and operate, or contract for the operation
of, freestanding evaluation and treatment facilities or agreements with local
evaluation and treatment facilities which shall include (a) required admission
and treatment for short‑term inpatient care for any person enrolled in
community support or residential services, (b) discharge planning procedures,
(c) limitations on admissions or transfers to state hospitals, (d) adequate
psychiatric supervision, (e) prospective payment methods, and (f) contractual
assurances regarding referrals to local evaluation and treatment facilities
from regional support networks.

(8))) Regional support networks may receive
technical assistance from the housing trust fund and may identify and submit
projects for housing and housing support services to the housing trust fund
established under chapter 43.185 RCW. Projects identified or submitted under
this subsection must be fully integrated with the regional support network six‑year
operating and capital plan, timeline, and budget required by subsection (1) of
this section.

Sec. 17. RCW 71.24.310 and 1989 c
205 s 6 are each amended to read as follows:

The legislature finds
that administration of chapter 71.05 RCW and this chapter can be most
efficiently and effectively implemented as part of the regional support network
defined in RCW 71.24.025. For this reason, the legislature intends that any
enhanced program funding for implementation of chapter 71.05 RCW or this
chapter, except for funds allocated for implementation of mandatory statewide
programs as required by federal statute, be made available ((primarily))
only to those counties participating in regional support networks.

Sec. 18. RCW 71.24.400 and 1999 c
10 s 10 are each amended to read as follows:

The legislature finds
that the current complex set of federal, state, and local rules and
regulations, audited and administered at multiple levels, which affect the
community mental health service delivery system, focus primarily on the process
of providing mental health services and do not sufficiently address consumer
and system outcomes. The legislature finds that the department and the
community mental health service delivery system must make ongoing efforts to
achieve the purposes set forth in RCW 71.24.015 related to reduced
administrative layering, duplication, elimination of process measures,
and reduced administrative costs.

Sec. 19. RCW 71.24.405 and 1999 c
10 s 11 are each amended to read as follows:

The department shall
establish a ((single)) comprehensive and collaborative ((project))
effort within regional support networks and with local mental health
service providers aimed at creating innovative and streamlined community mental
health service delivery systems, in order to carry out the purposes set forth
in RCW 71.24.400 and to capture the diversity of the community mental health
service delivery system.

The ((project)) department
must accomplish the following:

(1) Identification,
review, and cataloging of all rules, regulations, duplicative administrative
and monitoring functions, and other requirements that currently lead to
inefficiencies in the community mental health service delivery system and, if
possible, eliminate the requirements;

(2) The systematic and
incremental development of a single system of accountability for all federal,
state, and local funds provided to the community mental health service delivery
system. Systematic efforts should be made to include federal and local funds
into the single system of accountability;

(3) The elimination of
process regulations and related contract and reporting requirements. In place
of the regulations and requirements, a set of outcomes for mental health adult
and children clients according to chapter 71.24 RCW must be used to measure the
performance of mental health service providers and regional support networks.
Such outcomes shall focus on stabilizing out-of-home and hospital care,
increasing stable community living, increasing age-appropriate activities,
achieving family and consumer satisfaction with services, and system
efficiencies;

(4) Evaluation of the
feasibility of contractual agreements between the department of social and
health services and regional support networks and mental health service
providers that link financial incentives to the success or failure of mental
health service providers and regional support networks to meet outcomes
established for mental health service clients;

(5) The involvement of
mental health consumers and their representatives ((in the pilot projects)).
Mental health consumers and their representatives will be involved in the development
of outcome standards for mental health clients ((and other related aspects
of the pilot projects)) under section 4 of this act; and

(6) An
independent evaluation component to measure the success of the ((projects))
department in fully implementing the provisions of RCW 71.24.400 and this
section.

---
END ---