BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF
WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec.
1. A new section is added
to chapter 41.05 RCW to read as follows:

(1) In consultation
with state and local agencies and private parties, the administrator shall
oversee the development of a therapeutic and cost-effective prescription drug
education and utilization system designed to promote therapeutic and
cost-effective utilization of prescription drugs by residents of the state of
Washington.

(2) In carrying out his
or her duties under this act, the administrator shall request the participation
of the department of social and health services, the department of health, the state
board of health, the department of corrections, the department of labor and
industries, the office of the insurance commissioner, physicians, advanced
registered nurse practitioners, hospitals, pharmacists, the board of pharmacy
and any other appropriate licensing boards, consumer representatives, health
plans as defined in RCW 48.43.005, pharmacy benefits management companies,
self-insured employer sponsored health benefits plans, and any other interested
party.

(3) In carrying out his
or her duties under this act, the administrator may:

(a) Contract with third
parties for services necessary to carry out its activities under this act where
contracting will promote economy, avoid duplication of effort, and make the
best use of available expertise. Any such contractor or consultant is
prohibited from releasing, publishing, or otherwise using any information made
available to it under its contractual responsibility without specific
permission of the administrator;

(b) Call upon state
agencies to provide available information as necessary to assist the
administrator in meeting his or her responsibilities under this act, which
information shall be supplied as promptly as circumstances permit;

(c) Appoint technical
or advisory committees, as he or she deems necessary. Individuals appointed to
any technical or other advisory committee may be reimbursed for their travel
expenses under RCW 43.03.050 and 43.03.060;

(d) Solicit, accept,
and spend public and private grants, contributions, and other funds to match
public funds appropriated to carry out the purposes of this act.

(4) The system must
include, but is not limited to:

(a) A uniform formulary
of prescription drugs and a system for prescription drug utilization review for
state purchased health care programs as provided in section 2 of this act. In
consultation with appropriate state agencies, the administrator may determine
the extent to which the formulary or prescription drug utilization review
system will apply to each state-purchased health care program;

(b) A program of
academic detailing and consumer counterdetailing that educates physicians and
other prescribers and consumers on the therapeutic and cost-effective
utilization of prescription drugs. In developing this program, the
administrator shall:

(i) First assess
current private and public sector academic detailing and consumer
counterdetailing activities in Washington state. The program developed under
this subsection should be designed to complement, coordinate, and strengthen
these existing activities; and

(ii) Ensure that the
program developed under this subsection is consistent with and supports
successful implementation of the formulary developed under section 2 of this
act;

(c) Recommendations for
continuing medical education opportunities for physicians and other health care
professionals who prescribe, dispense, or administer prescription drugs. Any
continuing medical education program recommended or offered as a result of
efforts under this section must ensure that information presented to attendees
regarding utilization of prescription drugs is unbiased;

(d) Disease management
pilot projects, as provided in section 4 of this act; and

(e) Any other program
or activity designed to ensure optimal therapeutic and cost-effective
utilization of prescription drugs by consumers.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
2. A new section is added
to chapter 41.05 RCW to read as follows:

(1) The administrator
shall establish a pharmacy and therapeutics committee to develop a uniform
formulary for state-purchased health care.

(a) The pharmacy and
therapeutics committee may be established directly or through a contract with a
private organization. The committee must be composed of actively practicing
health care professionals, including physicians, pharmacists, advanced
registered nurse practitioners, at least one health care professional employed
by a health plan, as defined in RCW 48.43.005, and experts in
pharmacoeconomics. Additional specialty expertise and participation may be
obtained when necessary.

(b) The formulary must
be based upon careful consideration and pharmacoeconomic analysis, giving
primary consideration to clinical efficacy of prescription drugs that have been
approved by the federal food and drug administration. Cost considerations can
influence decisions regarding prescription drugs to be included in the
formulary only after safety, efficacy, and therapeutic need have been
evaluated. When safety, efficacy, and clinical outcomes of a drug are similar
to those of existing formulary drugs, or where a positive economic outcome is
not expected with a new drug, it is rational to make a drug formulary decision
based upon the unit cost of that drug. Any other public or private entity may
choose to adopt the formulary developed under this subsection.

(c) The formulary must
include clear standards and procedures for an exception process to ensure
consumer access to medically necessary alternatives to the formulary. No
formulary can account for every therapeutic eventuality or unique patient
need. The procedures to allow the prescribing of nonformulary medications must
neither pose a substantial barrier to the prescribing health care professional
nor hinder the consumer's ability to receive necessary medication. However, to
encourage the use of clinically efficacious and cost-effective drugs, the
administrator may relate prescription drug cost-sharing to the formulary status
of a drug.

(d) The administrator
may require pharmaceutical manufacturers to submit available pharmacoeconomic
data, including clinical and cost outcomes, safety, efficacy, and effectiveness
information, to the pharmacy and therapeutics committee in a standardized
format to assist the committee in its evaluation of prescription drug products.

(e) Due to the
sensitivity of proprietary or nonpublished data that may be used to evaluate
prescription drug products for inclusion on the formulary, meetings of the
pharmacy and therapeutics committee shall be exempted from application of the
open public meetings act, chapter 42.30 RCW.

(2) The drug
utilization review program must include but is not limited to prescription drug
review, management, and education, including prospective, concurrent, and
retrospective review, to improve the quality of pharmaceutical care by ensuring
that prescription drugs provided through state-purchased health care programs
are appropriate, medically necessary, and not likely to produce adverse medical
results.

The administrator may
establish a drug utilization review committee either directly or through a
contract with a private organization to assist in development and
implementation of the drug utilization review program. The committee should be
composed of actively practicing health care professionals. Additional
specialty expertise may be obtained as needed. Due to the sensitivity of
proprietary or nonpublished data that may be used by the drug utilization
review committee, meetings of the committee shall be exempted from application
of the open public meetings act, chapter 42.30 RCW.

Sec. 3. RCW 41.05.026 and 1991 c
79 s 1 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) When soliciting
proposals for the purpose of awarding contracts for goods or services, the
administrator shall, upon written request by the bidder, exempt from public
inspection and copying such proprietary data, trade secrets, or other
information contained in the bidder's proposal that relate to the bidder's
unique methods of conducting business or of determining prices or premium rates
to be charged for services under terms of the proposal.

(2) Actuarial formulas,
statistics, cost and utilization data, or other proprietary information submitted
upon request of the administrator or board by a contracting insurer, health
care service contractor, health maintenance organization, or vendor may be
withheld at any time from public inspection when necessary to preserve trade
secrets or prevent unfair competition.

(3) Proprietary
information submitted upon request of the administrator by any insurer, vendor,
pharmaceutical manufacturer, or other entity/person for the purpose of
analyzing and developing cost containment options, delivery alternatives,
prescription drug education and utilization systems, and consolidated
purchasing for state-purchased health care programs may be withheld at any time
from public inspection when necessary to preserve trade secrets or prevent
unfair competition.

(4) The board
may hold an executive session during any regular or special meeting to discuss
information submitted in accordance with subsection (1) or (2) of this section.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
4. A new section is added
to chapter 41.05 RCW to read as follows:

The administrator shall
design and implement at least two pilot disease management programs for persons
covered through state-purchased health care programs. The programs shall begin
operation on or before July 1, 2002.

(1) The administrator
shall determine, in consultation with appropriate state agencies, the disease
groups most appropriate for disease management and the state-purchased health
care programs to which the disease management programs will apply, after
reviewing claims and cost information and research on the effectiveness of
disease management programs. The following disease groups should first be
considered for disease management programs: Asthma, diabetes, cardiovascular disease,
malignancies, obesity, hemophilia, renal disease, transplants, intervertebral
disc disorders, and populations at highest risk of improper use of medication.

(2) Each pilot disease
management program must include physicians, pharmacists, and other appropriate
health care providers in the design and implementation of the program.
Physicians may not be required to participate in a disease management program
as a condition of contracting to provide state-purchased health care services.

(3) The programs must
incorporate an evaluation component that will allow the administrator to
identify successful programs that are candidates for statewide expansion. The
evaluation should consider the impact of the disease management program upon
the health status of participating enrollees, the use of health services by
these enrollees, and the overall costs of treating these enrollees.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
5. A new section is added
to chapter 41.05 RCW to read as follows:

Any savings to health
care benefit programs administered by the public employees' benefits board that
result from implementation of the therapeutic and cost-effective prescription
drug education and utilization system under this act must be deposited into the
public employees' and retirees' insurance account established under RCW
41.05.120.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
6. A new section is added
to chapter 41.05 RCW to read as follows:

(1) By January 1, 2002,
the administrator shall submit to the governor and the legislature a progress
report regarding the implementation of the therapeutic and cost-effective
prescription drug education and utilization system.

(2) Beginning on
January 1, 2003, and by January 1st of each year through 2005, the administrator
shall submit to the governor and the legislature a report on the impacts of the
therapeutic and cost-effective prescription drug education and utilization
system. The report shall be prepared in consultation with the agencies and
organizations participating in development of the system under section 1 of
this act, and may present recommendations for modifications to the system, or
for additional strategies that should be pursued to promote therapeutic and
cost-effective utilization of prescription drugs by residents of the state of
Washington.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
7. The sum of one hundred
thousand dollars, or as much thereof as may be necessary, is appropriated for
the biennium ending June 30, 2003, from the health services account to the
health care authority for the purposes of sections 1 and 2 of this act.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 8. This act is necessary for
the immediate preservation of the public peace, health, or safety, or support
of the state government and its existing public institutions, and takes effect
July 1, 2001.

---
END ---