BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF
WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1. RCW 46.09.020 and 1986 c
206 s 1 are each amended to read as follows:

As used in this chapter
the following words and phrases have the designated meanings unless a different
meaning is expressly provided or the context otherwise clearly indicates:

"Person"
means any individual, firm, partnership, association, or corporation.

"Nonhighway
vehicle" means any motorized vehicle when used for recreation travel on
trails and nonhighway roads or for recreation cross-country travel on any one
of the following or a combination thereof: Land, water, snow, ice, marsh,
swampland, and other natural terrain. Such vehicles include but are not
limited to, off-road vehicles, two, three, or four-wheel vehicles, motorcycles,
four-wheel drive vehicles, dune buggies, amphibious vehicles, ground effects or
air cushion vehicles, and any other means of land transportation deriving
motive power from any source other than muscle or wind.

Nonhighway vehicle does
not include:

(1) Any vehicle
designed primarily for travel on, over, or in the water;

(2) Snowmobiles or any
military vehicles; or

(3) Any vehicle
eligible for a motor vehicle fuel tax exemption or rebate under chapter 82.36
RCW while an exemption or rebate is claimed. This exemption includes but is
not limited to farm, construction, and logging vehicles.

"Off-road
vehicle" or "ORV" means any nonhighway vehicle when used for
cross-country travel on trails or on any one of the following or a combination
thereof: Land, water, snow, ice, marsh, swampland and other natural terrain.

"ORV use
permit" means a permit issued for operation of an off-road vehicle under
this chapter.

"ORV trail"
means a multiple-use corridor designated and maintained for recreational travel
by off-road vehicles that is not normally suitable for travel by conventional
two-wheel drive vehicles and is posted or designated by the managing authority
of the property that the trail traverses as permitting ORV travel.

"ORV use
area" means the entire area of a parcel of land, except for ORV
trails and camping and approved buffer areas, that is posted or
designated for ORV use in accordance with rules adopted by the managing
authority.

"ORV recreation
facility" includes ORV trails and ORV use areas.

"Owner" means
the person other than the lienholder, having an interest in or title to a
nonhighway vehicle, and entitled to the use or possession thereof.

"Operator"
means each person who operates, or is in physical control of, any nonhighway
vehicle.

"Dealer"
means a person, partnership, association, or corporation engaged in the
business of selling off-road vehicles at wholesale or retail in this state.

"Department"
means the department of licensing.

"Hunt" means
any effort to kill, injure, capture, or purposely disturb a wild animal or wild
bird.

"Nonhighway
road" means any road owned or managed by a public agency, or any private
road for which the owner has granted a permanent easement for public use of the
road, other than a highway generally capable of travel by a conventional
two-wheel drive passenger automobile during most of the year and in use by such
vehicles and that is not built or maintained with appropriations from the motor
vehicle fund.

"Nonmotorized
trail" means a recreational trail corridor designated and maintained for
nonmotorized use, and posted or designated by the managing authority of the
property to exclude ORV travel.

"Nonhighway
road use area" means the entire area of a parcel of land, except for the
nonhighway road and approved buffer areas, that is posted or designated in
accordance with rules adopted by the managing authority to exclude ORV use.

"Nonhighway
road recreation facility" includes nonhighway roads, nonhighway road use
areas, and nonmotorized trails.

"Highway,"
for the purpose of this chapter only, means the entire width between the
boundary lines of every way publicly maintained by the state department of
transportation or any county or city when any part thereof is generally open to
the use of the public for purposes of vehicular travel as a matter of right.

"Organized
competitive event" means any competition, advertised in advance through
written notice to organized clubs or published in local newspapers, sponsored
by recognized clubs, and conducted at a predetermined time and place.

Sec. 2. RCW 46.09.170 and 1995 c
166 s 9 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) From time to time,
but at least once each year, the state treasurer shall refund from the motor
vehicle fund one percent of the motor vehicle fuel tax revenues collected under
chapter 82.36 RCW, based on the tax rate in effect January 1, 1990, less proper
deductions for refunds and costs of collection as provided in RCW 46.68.090. The
treasurer shall place these funds in the general fund as follows:

(a) Forty percent shall
be credited to the ORV and nonhighway vehicle account and administered by the
department of natural resources solely for planning, maintenance, and
management of ORV recreation facilities, nonhighway roads, and nonhighway road
recreation facilities. The funds under this subsection shall be expended in
accordance with the following limitations:

(i) Not more than five
percent may be expended for information programs under this chapter;

(ii) Not less than ten
percent and not more than fifty percent may be expended for ORV recreation
facilities;

(iii) Not more than
twenty-five percent may be expended for maintenance of nonhighway roads;

(iv) Not more than
fifty percent may be expended for nonhighway road recreation facilities;

(v) Ten percent shall
be transferred to the interagency committee for outdoor recreation for grants
to law enforcement agencies in those counties where the department of natural
resources maintains ORV facilities. This amount is in addition to those
distributions made by the interagency committee for outdoor recreation under
(d)(i) of this subsection;

(b) Three and one-half
percent shall be credited to the ORV and nonhighway vehicle account and
administered by the department of fish and wildlife solely for the acquisition,
planning, development, maintenance, and management of nonhighway roads and
recreation facilities;

(c) Two percent shall
be credited to the ORV and nonhighway vehicle account and administered by the
parks and recreation commission solely for the maintenance and management of
ORV use areas and facilities; and

(d) Fifty-four and
one-half percent, together with the funds received by the interagency committee
for outdoor recreation under RCW 46.09.110, shall be credited to the nonhighway
and off-road vehicle activities program account to be administered by the
committee for planning, acquisition, development, maintenance, and management
of ORV ((recreation facilities)) and nonhighway road recreation
facilities; ORV user education and information; and ORV law enforcement
programs. The funds under this subsection shall be expended in accordance with
the following limitations:

(i) ((Not more than
twenty percent may be expended for ORV education, information, and law
enforcement programs under this chapter;

(ii) Not less than
an amount equal to the funds received by the interagency committee for outdoor
recreation under RCW 46.09.110 and not more than sixty percent may be expended
for ORV recreation facilities;

(iii) Not more than
twenty percent may be expended for nonhighway road recreation facilities)) Not less than forty percent plus an amount
equal to the funds received by the interagency committee for outdoor recreation
under RCW 46.09.110, and not more than sixty percent must be expended for ORV
recreation facilities and programs under this chapter.

(ii) Not less than
one-half of the minimum forty percent established in (i) of this subsection
(1)(d) must be expended for ORV education and law enforcement programs under
this chapter.

(iii) Not less than
forty percent and not more than sixty percent must be expended for uses
relating to nonmotorized trail recreation facilities and programs under this chapter.

(2) On a yearly basis
an agency may not, except as provided in RCW 46.09.110, expend more than ten
percent of the funds it receives under this chapter for general administration
expenses incurred in carrying out this chapter.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
3. A new section is added
to chapter 46.09 RCW to read as follows:

(1) The interagency
committee for outdoor recreation and the department of licensing shall jointly
contract with an independent entity to study the sources and determine the
distributions and uses of funds provided to off-road vehicle and nonhighway
road recreational activities under RCW 46.09.170. The study must analyze and
determine the relative portion of the motor vehicle fuel tax revenues deposited
to the general fund under RCW 46.09.170 that are attributable to vehicles
operating off road or on nonhighway roads for recreational activities, and the
types of facilities used.

(2) The interagency
committee for outdoor recreation and the department of licensing shall jointly
review the analysis and submit a report to the appropriate standing committees
of the legislature, including recommendations regarding amendments to RCW
46.09.170 to allocate revenues consistent with the relative proportion for the
uses generating the revenues. In making the recommendations, the committee and
department shall specifically consider joint use by nonmotorized recreational
users of trails funded as ORV recreational facilities. The report must be
submitted no later than January 1, 2002.

(3) Funds appropriated
to the nonhighway and off-road vehicle activities program under RCW
46.09.170(1)(d) must be used to implement subsections (1) and (2) of this
section. Funds spent on the implementation of this section are in addition to
agency general administration expenditure limitations of RCW 46.09.170(2).

Sec. 4. RCW 46.09.240 and 1998 c
144 s 1 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) After deducting
administrative expenses and the expense of any programs conducted under this
chapter, the interagency committee for outdoor recreation shall, at least once
each year, distribute the funds it receives under RCW 46.09.110 and 46.09.170
to state agencies, counties, municipalities, federal agencies, nonprofit ORV
organizations, and Indian tribes((.)) with the following limitations:

(a) Funds
distributed under this section to nonprofit ORV organizations may be spent only
on projects or activities that benefit ORV recreation on lands once publicly
owned that come into private ownership in a federally approved land exchange
completed between January 1, 1998, and January 1, 2005;

(b) The interagency
committee for outdoor recreation shall not distribute ORV funds to federal
agencies under this chapter that are to be spent for ORV capital or
reconstruction projects that would facilitate increased ORV activity in
federally inventoried roadless areas that are defined in approved national
forest management plans;

(c) Funds
distributed under 46.09.170(1)(d)(iii)may be awarded for nonmotorized trail
projects on tribal lands regardless of proximity to a nonhighway road.

The committee shall
adopt rules governing applications for funds administered by the agency under
this chapter and shall determine the amount of money distributed to each
applicant. Except for funds granted under RCW 46.09.170(1)(d)(ii), the
committee shall also establish grant evaluation criteria that place the highest
priority on volunteer contributions. Agencies receiving funds under this
chapter for capital purposes shall consider the possibility of contracting with
the state parks and recreation commission, the department of natural resources,
or other federal, state, and local agencies to employ the youth development and
conservation corps or other youth crews in completing the project.

(2) The interagency
committee shall require each applicant for land acquisition or development
funds under this section to conduct, before submitting the application, a
public hearing in the nearest town of five hundred population or more, and
publish notice of such hearing on the same day of each week for two consecutive
weeks as follows:

(a) In the newspaper of
general circulation published nearest the proposed project;

(b) In the newspaper
having the largest circulation in the county or counties where the proposed
project is located; and

(c) If the proposed
project is located in a county with a population of less than forty thousand,
the notice shall also be published in the newspaper having the largest
circulation published in the nearest county that has a population of forty
thousand or more.

(3) The notice shall
state that the purpose of the hearing is to solicit comments regarding an
application being prepared for submission to the interagency committee for
outdoor recreation for acquisition or development funds under the off-road and
nonhighway vehicle program. The applicant shall file notice of the hearing
with the department of ecology at the main office in Olympia and shall comply
with the State Environmental Policy Act, chapter 43.21C RCW. A written record
and a magnetic tape recording of the hearing shall be included in the
application.

Sec. 5. RCW 46.09.280 and 1986 c
206 s 13 are each amended to read as follows:

The
interagency committee for outdoor recreation shall establish a committee of
nonhighway road recreationists, including representatives of organized ORV and
nonmotorized recreation groups, and governmental entities maintaining
areas or providing services eligible for funding under RCW 46.09.170, to
provide advice regarding the administration of this chapter. The
interagency committee for outdoor recreation shall use available, credible,
recreation participation data to establish an advisory committee that is
proportionate to the number of people participating in the various recreation
activities related to this chapter. The recreation participation data must be
reviewed every five years, beginning January 1, 2005, to consider recomposition
of the advisory committee. Only representatives of organized ORV groups
may be voting members of the committee with respect to expenditure of funds
received under RCW 46.09.110.

---
END ---