BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF
WASHINGTON:

_9 NEW SECTION. Sec. 1. The legislature
recognizes that

10 efficiencies, improvements in customer service, and
economies can

11 be achieved by merging the operations of agencies with
like

12 functions. Both the public printer and the department
of general

13 administration provide vital direct central services to
state

14 agencies and their other clients, which involve large
scale

15 purchasing, mailing, and distribution and storage.
Because of these

16 functional similarities, there is overlap and
duplication of some

17 services, administrative functions, and facilities and
equipment.

18 It is, therefore, the intent of the legislature, to
transfer

p. 1 HB
1654

_1 the powers, duties, and functions of the public printer
to the

_2 department of general administration to strengthen the
ability of

_3 both agencies to provide optimal central services to
their

_4 clients. By combining the resources of the two
agencies, the

_5 legislature expects that service duplications will be
eliminated,

_6 administrative functions streamlined, distribution
networks

_7 coordinated, facility and equipment use maximized, and
other

_8 efficiencies and economies achieved.

_9 NEW SECTION. Sec. 2. A new section is
added to chapter 43.78

10 RCW to read as follows:

11 (1) The office of the public printer is hereby
abolished and

12 its powers, duties, and functions are hereby transferred
to the

13 department of general administration. All references to
the public

14 printer or the state printer in the Revised Code of
Washington

15 shall be construed to mean the director or the
department of

16 general administration.

17 (2)(a) All reports, documents, surveys, books,
records, files,

18 papers, or written material in the possession of the
public

19 printer shall be delivered to the custody of the
department of

20 general administration. All cabinets, furniture, office
equipment,

21 motor vehicles, and other tangible property employed by
the public

22 printer shall be made available to the department of
general

23 administration. All funds, credits, or other assets
held by the

24 public printer shall be assigned to the department of
general

25 administration.

26 (b) If any question arises as to the transfer of any
personnel,

27 funds, books, documents, records, papers, files,
equipment, or

28 other tangible property used or held in the exercise of
the powers

29 and the performance of the duties and functions
transferred, the

30 director of financial management shall make a determination
as to

31 the proper allocation and certify the same to the state
agencies

32 concerned.

33 (3) All employees of the public printer are
transferred to the

34 jurisdiction of the department of general
administration. All

35 employees classified under chapter 41.06 RCW, the state
civil

36 service law, are assigned to the department of general

37 administration to perform their usual duties upon the
same terms

HB 1654 p. 2

_1 as formerly, without any loss of rights, subject to any action

_2 that may be appropriate thereafter in accordance with
the laws and

_3 rules governing state civil service.

_4 (4) All rules and all pending business before the
public

_5 printer shall be continued and acted upon by the
department of

_6 general administration. All existing contracts and
obligations

_7 shall remain in full force and shall be performed by the

_8 department of general administration.

_9 (5) The transfer of the powers, duties, functions,
and

10 personnel of the public printer shall not affect the
validity of

11 any act performed before the effective date of this
section.

12 (6) If apportionments of budgeted funds are required
because of

13 the transfers directed by this section, the director of
financial

14 management shall certify the apportionments to the
agencies

15 affected, the state auditor, and the state treasurer.
Each of these

16 shall make the appropriate transfer and adjustments in
funds and

17 appropriation accounts and equipment records in accordance
with

18 the certification.

19 (7) Nothing contained in this section may be
construed to alter

20 any existing collective bargaining unit or the
provisions of any

21 existing collective bargaining agreement until the
agreement has

22 expired or until the bargaining unit has been modified.
Nothing

23 contained in this section may be construed to alter any
right to

24 bargain collectively of employees or positions in the
state

25 printing plant within the department of general
administration.

26 Sec. 3. RCW
41.06.070 and 1998 c 245 s 40 are each amended to read

27 as follows:

28 (1) The provisions of this chapter do not apply to:

29 (a) The members of the legislature or to any
employee of, or

30 position in, the legislative branch of the state
government

31 including members, officers, and employees of the
legislative

32 council, joint legislative audit and review committee,
statute law

33 committee, and any interim committee of the legislature;

34 (b) The justices of the supreme court, judges of the
court of

35 appeals, judges of the superior courts or of the
inferior courts,

36 or to any employee of, or position in the judicial
branch of state

37 government;

p. 3 HB
1654

_1 (c) Officers, academic personnel, and employees of
technical

_2 colleges;

_3 (d) The officers of the Washington state patrol;

_4 (e) Elective officers of the state;

_5 (f) The chief executive officer of each agency;

_6 (g) In the departments of employment security and
social and

_7 health services, the director and the director's
confidential

_8 secretary; in all other departments, the executive head
of which

_9 is an individual appointed by the governor, the
director, his or

10 her confidential secretary, and his or her statutory
assistant

11 directors;

12 (h) In the case of a multimember board, commission,
or

13 committee, whether the members thereof are elected,
appointed by

14 the governor or other authority, serve ex officio, or
are

15 otherwise chosen:

16 (i) All members of such boards, commissions, or
committees;

17 (ii) If the members of the board, commission, or
committee

18 serve on a part-time basis and there is a statutory
executive

19 officer: The secretary of the board, commission, or committee;
the

20 chief executive officer of the board, commission, or
committee;

21 and the confidential secretary of the chief executive
officer of

22 the board, commission, or committee;

23 (iii) If the members of the board, commission, or
committee

24 serve on a full-time basis: The chief executive officer
or

25 administrative officer as designated by the board,
commission, or

26 committee; and a confidential secretary to the chair of
the board,

27 commission, or committee;

28 (iv) If all members of the board, commission, or
committee

29 serve ex officio: The chief executive officer; and the
confidential

30 secretary of such chief executive officer;

31 (i) The confidential secretaries and administrative
assistants

32 in the immediate offices of the elective officers of the
state;

33 (j) Assistant attorneys general;

34 (k) Commissioned and enlisted personnel in the
military service

35 of the state;

36 (l) Inmate, student, part-time, or temporary
employees, and

37 part-time professional consultants, as defined by the
Washington

38 personnel resources board;

HB 1654 p. 4

_1 (m) ((The public printer or to any)) Employees
of or positions

_2 in the state printing plant within the department of
general

_3 administration;

_4 (n) Officers and employees of the Washington state
fruit

_5 commission;

_6 (o) Officers and employees of the Washington state
apple

_7 advertising commission;

_8 (p) Officers and employees of the Washington state
dairy

_9 products commission;

10 (q) Officers and employees of the Washington tree
fruit

11 research commission;

12 (r) Officers and employees of the Washington state
beef

13 commission;

14 (s) Officers and employees of any commission formed
under

15 chapter 15.66 RCW;

16 (t) ((Officers and employees of the state wheat
commission

17 formed under chapter 15.63 RCW;

18 (u))) Officers and employees of agricultural
commissions formed

19 under chapter 15.65 RCW;

20 (((v))) (u) Officers and employees of
the nonprofit corporation

21 formed under chapter 67.40 RCW;

22 (((w))) (v) Executive assistants for
personnel administration

23 and labor relations in all state agencies employing such
executive

24 assistants including but not limited to all departments,
offices,

25 commissions, committees, boards, or other bodies subject
to the

26 provisions of this chapter and this subsection shall
prevail over

27 any provision of law inconsistent herewith unless
specific

28 exception is made in such law;

29 (((x))) (w) In each agency with fifty
or more employees: Deputy

30 agency heads, assistant directors or division directors,
and not

31 more than three principal policy assistants who report
directly to

32 the agency head or deputy agency heads;

33 (((y))) (x) All employees of the
marine employees' commission;

34 (((z) Up to a total of five senior staff
positions of the

35 western library network under chapter 27.26 RCW
responsible for

36 formulating policy or for directing program
management of a major

37 administrative unit. This subsection (1)(z) shall
expire on June

38 30, 1997;

p. 5 HB
1654

_1 (aa))) (y) Staff employed by the
department of community,

_2 trade, and economic development to administer energy
policy

_3 functions and manage energy site evaluation council
activities

_4 under RCW 43.21F.045(2)(m);

_5 (((bb))) (z) Staff employed by
Washington State University to

_6 administer energy education, applied research, and
technology

_7 transfer programs under RCW 43.21F.045 as provided in
RCW

_8 28B.30.900(5).

_9 (2) The following classifications, positions, and
employees of

10 institutions of higher education and related boards are
hereby

11 exempted from coverage of this chapter:

12 (a) Members of the governing board of each institution
of

13 higher education and related boards, all presidents,
vice-

14 presidents, and their confidential secretaries,
administrative,

15 and personal assistants; deans, directors, and chairs;
academic

16 personnel; and executive heads of major administrative
or academic

17 divisions employed by institutions of higher education;
principal

18 assistants to executive heads of major administrative or
academic

19 divisions; other managerial or professional employees in
an

20 institution or related board having substantial
responsibility for

21 directing or controlling program operations and
accountable for

22 allocation of resources and program results, or for the

23 formulation of institutional policy, or for carrying out
personnel

24 administration or labor relations functions, legislative

25 relations, public information, development, senior
computer

26 systems and network programming, or internal audits and

27 investigations; and any employee of a community college
district

28 whose place of work is one which is physically located
outside the

29 state of Washington and who is employed pursuant to RCW
28B.50.092

30 and assigned to an educational program operating outside
of the

31 state of Washington;

32 (b) Student, part-time, or temporary employees, and
part-time

33 professional consultants, as defined by the Washington
personnel

34 resources board, employed by institutions of higher
education and

35 related boards;

36 (c) The governing board of each institution, and
related

37 boards, may also exempt from this chapter
classifications

38 involving research activities, counseling of students,
extension

HB 1654 p. 6

_1 or continuing education activities, graphic arts or
publications

_2 activities requiring prescribed academic preparation or
special

_3 training as determined by the board: PROVIDED, That no
nonacademic

_4 employee engaged in office, clerical, maintenance, or
food and

_5 trade services may be exempted by the board under this
provision;

_6 (d) Printing craft employees in the department of
printing at

_7 the University of Washington.

_8 (3) In addition to the exemptions specifically
provided by this

_9 chapter, the Washington personnel resources board may
provide for

10 further exemptions pursuant to the following
procedures. The

11 governor or other appropriate elected official may
submit requests

12 for exemption to the Washington personnel resources
board stating

13 the reasons for requesting such exemptions. The Washington

14 personnel resources board shall hold a public hearing,
after

15 proper notice, on requests submitted pursuant to this

16 subsection. If the board determines that the position
for which

17 exemption is requested is one involving substantial
responsibility

18 for the formulation of basic agency or executive policy
or one

19 involving directing and controlling program operations
of an

20 agency or a major administrative division thereof, the
Washington

21 personnel resources board shall grant the request and
such

22 determination shall be final as to any decision made
before July

23 1, 1993. The total number of additional exemptions
permitted under

24 this subsection shall not exceed one percent of the
number of

25 employees in the classified service not including
employees of

26 institutions of higher education and related boards for
those

27 agencies not directly under the authority of any elected
public

28 official other than the governor, and shall not exceed a
total of

29 twenty-five for all agencies under the authority of
elected public

30 officials other than the governor.

31 The salary and fringe benefits of all positions
presently or

32 hereafter exempted except for the chief executive
officer of each

33 agency, full-time members of boards and commissions,

34 administrative assistants and confidential secretaries
in the

35 immediate office of an elected state official, and the
personnel

36 listed in subsections (1)(j) through (((v))) (u),
(((y), (z)))

37 (x), and (2) of this section, shall be determined
by the

38 Washington personnel resources board. However,
beginning with

p. 7 HB
1654

_1 changes proposed for the 1997-99 fiscal biennium,
changes to the

_2 classification plan affecting exempt salaries must meet
the same

_3 provisions for classified salary increases resulting
from

_4 adjustments to the classification plan as outlined in
RCW

_5 41.06.152.

_6 Any person holding a classified position subject to
the

_7 provisions of this chapter shall, when and if such
position is

_8 subsequently exempted from the application of this
chapter, be

_9 afforded the following rights: If such person
previously held

10 permanent status in another classified position, such
person shall

11 have a right of reversion to the highest class of
position

12 previously held, or to a position of similar nature and
salary.

13 Any classified employee having civil service status
in a

14 classified position who accepts an appointment in an
exempt

15 position shall have the right of reversion to the
highest class of

16 position previously held, or to a position of similar
nature and

17 salary.

18 A person occupying an exempt position who is
terminated from

19 the position for gross misconduct or malfeasance does
not have the

20 right of reversion to a classified position as provided
for in

21 this section.

22 Sec. 4. RCW
43.78.030 and 1994 c 82 s 1 are each amended to read

23 as follows:

24 The ((public printer)) director of general
administration shall

25 print and bind the session laws, the journals of the two
houses of

26 the legislature, all bills, resolutions, documents, and
other

27 printing and binding of either the senate or house, as
the same

28 may be ordered by the legislature; and such forms,
blanks, record

29 books, and printing and binding of every description as
may be

30 ordered by all state officers, boards, commissions, and

31 institutions, and the supreme court, and the court of
appeals and

32 officers thereof, as the same may be ordered on
requisition, from

33 time to time, by the proper authorities. This section
shall not

34 apply to the printing of the supreme court and the court
of

35 appeals reports, to the printing of bond certificates or
bond

36 offering disclosure documents, to the printing of
educational

HB 1654 p. 8

_1 publications of the state historical societies, or to
any printing

_2 done or contracted for by institutions of higher
education:

_3 PROVIDED, That institutions of higher education, in
consultation

_4 with the ((public printer)) director of
general administration,

_5 develop vendor selection procedures comparable to those
used by

_6 the ((public printer)) director of general
administration for

_7 contracted printing jobs. Where any institution or
institution of

_8 higher learning of the state is or may become equipped
with

_9 facilities for doing such work, it may do any printing:
(1) For

10 itself, or (2) for any other state institution when such
printing

11 is done as part of a course of study relative to the
profession of

12 printer. Any printing and binding of whatever
description as may be

13 needed by any institution or agency of the state
department of

14 social and health services not at Olympia, or the
supreme court or

15 the court of appeals or any officer thereof, the
estimated cost of

16 which shall not exceed one thousand dollars, may be done
by any

17 private printing company in the general vicinity within
the state

18 of Washington so ordering, if in the judgment of the
officer of

19 the agency so ordering, the saving in time and
processing

20 justifies the award to such local private printing
concern.

21 Beginning on July 1, 1989, and on July 1 of each
succeeding odd-

22 numbered year, the dollar limit specified in this
section shall be

23 adjusted as follows: The office of financial management
shall

24 calculate such limit by adjusting the previous
biennium's limit by

25 an appropriate federal inflationary index reflecting the
rate of

26 inflation for the previous biennium. Such amounts shall
be rounded

27 to the nearest fifty dollars.

28 NEW SECTION. Sec. 5. A new section is
added to chapter 41.56

29 RCW to read as follows:

30 In addition to the entities listed in RCW 41.56.020,
this

31 chapter shall apply to the department of general
administration

32 with respect to printing craft employees in the state
printing

33 plant within the department of general administration.

34 Sec. 6. RCW
43.78.040 and 1965 c 8 s 43.78.040 are each amended to

35 read as follows:

36 All printing and binding shall be done under the
general

p. 9 HB
1654

_1 superintendence of the authorities ordering it, and when
completed

_2 shall be delivered to such authorities, who shall sign
receipts

_3 therefor.

_4 Before the ((public printer)) director of
general

_5 administration shall execute any printing or
binding for any

_6 office, board, commission, or institution, the proper
officer

_7 thereof shall apply therefor by requisition.

_8 Sec. 7. RCW
43.78.050 and 1965 c 8 s 43.78.050 are each amended

_9 to read as follows:

10 Upon delivering a printing or binding job and
receiving a

11 receipt therefor the ((public printer)) director
of general

12 administration shall make out, and deliver to the
requesting

13 agency an itemized statement of charges.

14 Sec. 8. RCW
43.78.070 and 1979 c 151 s 134 are each amended to

15 read as follows:

16 The ((public printer)) director of general
administration shall

17 use the state printing plant, which includes the
state copy

18 centers, upon the following conditions, to wit:

19 (1) ((He)) The director shall do the
public printing, and

20 charge therefor the fees as provided by law. ((He))
The director

21 may print the Washington Reports for the publishers
thereof under

22 a contract approved in writing by the governor.

23 (2) ((The gross income of the public printer))
All receipts

24 from the state printing plant shall be deposited
in ((an account

25 designated "state printing plant revolving
fund" in depositaries

26 approved by the state treasurer)) the general
administration

27 services account, and shall be disbursed ((by
the public printer

28 by check and only)) as follows:

29 ((First,)) (a) In payment of the
actual cost of labor,

30 material, supplies, replacements, repairs, water, light,
heat,

31 telephone, rent, and all other expenses necessary in the
operation

32 of the plant((: PROVIDED, That no machinery shall be
purchased

33 except on written approval of the governor));

34 ((Second,)) (b) In payment of the cost
of reasonable insurance

35 upon the printing plant((, payable to the state and
of all

36 fidelity bonds required by law of the public printer;

HB 1654 p. 10

_1 Third, in payment to the public printer of a
salary which shall

_2 be fixed by the governor in accordance with the
provisions of RCW

_3 43.03.040;

_4 Fourth, in remitting the balance to the state
treasurer for the

_5 general fund: PROVIDED, That a reasonable sum to be
determined by

_6 the governor, the public printer, and the director of
financial

_7 management shall be retained in the fund for working
capital for

_8 the public printer)).

_9 (3) Disbursements from the general administration
services

10 account for the cost of materials and services
purchased for

11 resale by the state printing plant are not subject to
allotment

12 procedures provided under chapter 43.88 RCW.
Disbursements from the

13 general administration services account for all other
expenses of

14 the state printing plant including administrative
expenses and all

15 staff costs are subject to the allotment procedures
provided under

16 chapter 43.88 RCW. An appropriation is not required
for

17 expenditures for the operation of the state printing
plant.

18 Sec. 9. RCW
43.78.090 and 1965 c 8 s 43.78.090 are each amended to

19 read as follows:

20 Whenever required by law or by the legislature or by
any state

21 officer, board, commission, or institution the ((public
printer))

22 director of general administration shall keep the
((type)) copy

23 used in printing any matter ((forming a part of the
first, second,

24 third, and fourth classes standing)) for a period
not exceeding

25 sixty days for use in reprinting such matter.

26 Sec. 10. RCW
43.78.100 and 1993 c 379 s 106 are each amended to

27 read as follows:

28 The ((public printer)) director of general
administration shall

29 furnish all paper, stock, and binding materials required
in all

30 public work, and shall charge the same to the state, as
it is

31 actually used, at the actual price at which it was
purchased plus

32 up to five percent for waste, insurance, storage,
and

33 han­dling. This section does not apply to institutions
of higher

34 education.

35

p. 11 HB
1654

_1 Sec. 11. RCW
43.78.105 and 1993 c 379 s 105 are each amended to

_2 read as follows:

_3 The ((public printer)) director of general
administration may

_4 use the state printing plant for the purposes of
printing or

_5 furnishing materials under RCW 43.78.100 if an
interlocal

_6 agreement under chapter 39.34 RCW has been executed
between an

_7 institu­tion of higher education and the ((public
printer))

_8 department of general administration.

_9 Sec. 12. RCW
43.78.110 and 1993 c 379 s 107 are each amended to

10 read as follows:

11 Whenever in the judgment of the ((public printer))
director of

12 general administration certain printing, ruling,
binding, or

13 supplies can be secured from private sources more
economically

14 than by doing the work or preparing the supplies in the
state

15 printing plant, the ((public printer)) director
may obtain such

16 work or supplies from such private sources.

17 In event any work or supplies are secured on behalf
of the

18 state under this section the state printing plant shall
be

19 entitled to add up to five percent to the cost thereof
to cover

20 the handling of the orders which shall be added to the
bills and

21 charged to the respective authorities ordering the work
or

22 supplies. The five percent handling charge shall not
apply to

23 contracts with institutions of higher education.

24 Sec. 13. RCW
43.78.170 and 1996 c 198 s 3 are each amended to read

25 as follows:

26 The ((public printer)) director of general
administration shall

27 take all actions consistent with the ((plan)) strategy
under RCW

28 43.19A.050 to ensure that seventy-five percent or more
of the

29 total dollar amount of printing paper stock used by the

30 ((printer)) state printing plant is
recycled content paper by

31 January 1, 1997, and ninety percent or more of the total
dollar

32 amount of printing paper stock used by the ((printer))
state

33 printing plant is recycled content paper by
January 1, 1999.

34 NEW SECTION. Sec. 14. The
following acts or parts of acts are each

35 repealed:

HB 1654 p. 12

_1 (1) RCW 43.78.010 (Appointment of
public printer) and 1981 c 338 s

_2 6 & 1965 c 8 s 43.78.010; and

_3 (2) RCW 43.78.020 (Bond) and 1965
c 8 s 43.78.020.

_4 NEW SECTION. Sec. 15. This act takes
effect July 1, 2002.

‑‑‑ END ‑‑‑

p. 13 HB
1654