BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF
WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec.
1. A new section is added
to chapter 77.04 RCW to read as follows:

(1) The commission must
appoint an advisory committee to generally represent the interests of disabled
hunters and fishers on matters including, but not limited to, special hunts,
modified sporting equipment, access to public land, and hunting and fishing
opportunities. The advisory committee is composed of seven members, each being
a person with a disability. The advisory committee members must represent the
entire state. The members must be appointed so that each of the six department
administrative regions, as they existed on January 1, 2001, are represented
with one resident on the advisory committee. One additional member must be
appointed at large. The chair of the advisory committee must be a member of
the advisory committee and shall be selected by the members of the advisory committee.

(2) For the purposes of
this section, a person with a disability includes but is not limited to:

(a) A permanently
disabled person who is not ambulatory over natural terrain without a prosthesis
or assistive device;

(b) A permanently
disabled person who is unable to walk without the use of assistance from a
brace, cane, crutch, wheelchair, scooter, walker, or other assistive device;

(c) A person who has a
cardiac condition to the extent that the person's functional limitations are
severe;

(d) A person who is
restricted by lung disease to the extent that the person's functional
limitations are severe;

(e) A person who is
totally blind or visually impaired; or

(f) A permanently
disabled person with upper or lower extremity impairments who does not have the
use of one or both upper or lower extremities.

(3) The members of the
advisory committee are appointed for a four-year term. If a vacancy occurs on
the advisory committee prior to the expiration of a term, the commission must
appoint a replacement within sixty days to complete the term.

(4) The advisory
committee must meet at least semi-annually, and may meet at other times as
requested by a majority of the advisory committee members for any express
purpose that directly relates to the duties set forth in subsection (1) of this
section. A majority of members currently serving on the advisory committee
constitutes a quorum. The department must provide two staff support persons
for all official advisory committee meetings.

(5) Each member of the
advisory committee shall serve without compensation but may be reimbursed for
travel expenses as authorized in RCW 43.03.050 and 43.03.060.

(6) The members of the
advisory committee, or individuals acting on their behalf, are immune from
civil liability for official acts performed in the course of their duties.

(7) The
provisions of this section constitute a pilot program that expires July 1,
2005. On December 1, 2004, the commission shall present a report to the
appropriate legislative committees detailing the effectiveness of the advisory
committee, including but not limited to, the participation levels, general
interest, quality of advice, and recommendations as to the advisory committee's
continuance or modification.

--- END ---