BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF
WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec.
1. The purpose of this act
is to provide flexibility for the department of transportation to adopt rules
that will allow certain fire-fighting apparatuses to operate on state and local
highways if they exceed existing gross weight limits currently established in
statute. The legislature recognizes that, due to their nature of operation,
fire-fighting apparatuses do not significantly contribute to the deterioration
of surface roadways. The legislature further recognizes that any exemption or
special permit that would allow the apparatuses to operate on state and local
highways should also consider any bridge located in the designated fire service
area to assure that the exemption or special permit will not result in any
potential damage to a bridge or similar structure. The legislature further
recognizes that any exemption or special permit granted as a result of this act
must not compromise existing state and federal safety standards.

Sec. 2. RCW 46.44.091 and 1989 c
52 s 1 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) Except as otherwise
provided in subsections (3) and (4) of this section, no special permit shall be
issued for movement on any state highway or route of a state highway within the
limits of any city or town where the gross weight, including load, exceeds the
following limits:

(a) Twenty-two thousand
pounds on a single axle or on dual axles with a wheelbase between the first and
second axles of less than three feet six inches;

(b) Forty-three
thousand pounds on dual axles having a wheelbase between the first and second
axles of not less than three feet six inches but less than seven feet;

(c) On any group of
axles or in the case of a vehicle employing two single axles with a wheel base
between the first and last axle of not less than seven feet but less than ten
feet, a weight in pounds determined by multiplying six thousand five hundred
times the distance in feet between the center of the first axle and the center
of the last axle of the group;

(d) On any group of
axles with a wheel base between the first and last axle of not less than ten
feet but less than thirty feet, a weight in pounds determined by multiplying
two thousand two hundred times the sum of twenty and the distance in feet
between the center of the first axle and the center of the last axle of the
group;

(e) On any group of
axles with a wheel base between the first and last axle of thirty feet or
greater, a weight in pounds determined by multiplying one thousand six hundred
times the sum of forty and the distance in feet between the center of the first
axle and the center of the last axle of the group.

(2) The total weight of
a vehicle or combination of vehicles allowable by special permit under
subsection (1) of this section shall be governed by the lesser of the weights
obtained by using the total number of axles as a group or any combination of
axles as a group.

(3) The weight
limitations pertaining to single axles may be exceeded to permit the movement
of equipment operating upon single pneumatic tires having a rim width of twenty
inches or more and a rim diameter of twenty-four inches or more or dual
pneumatic tires having a rim width of sixteen inches or more and a rim diameter
of twenty-four inches or more and specially designed vehicles manufactured and
certified for special permits prior to July 1, 1975.

(4) Permits may be
issued for weights in excess of the limitations contained in subsection (1) of
this section on highways or sections of highways which have been designed and
constructed for weights in excess of such limitations, or for any shipment duly
certified as necessary by military officials, or by officials of public or
private power facilities, or when in the opinion of the department of
transportation the movement or action is a necessary movement or action:
PROVIDED, That in the judgment of the department of transportation the
structures and highway surfaces on the routes involved are capable of
sustaining weights in excess of such limitations and it is not reasonable for
economic or operational considerations to transport such excess weights by rail
or water for any substantial distance of the total mileage applied for.

(5) Permits may be
issued for the operation of ((fire trucks on the public highways if the
maximum gross weight on any single axle does not exceed twenty-four thousand
pounds and the gross weight on any tandem axle does not exceed forty-three
thousand pounds)) fire-fighting apparatus to exceed the weight
limitations contained in subsection (1) of this section, subject to federal and
state rules and national standards adopted by the department of
transportation. A permit may be issued for a period up to five years.

(6)
Application shall be made in writing on special forms provided by the
department of transportation and shall be submitted at least thirty-six hours
in advance of the proposed movement. An application for a special permit for a
gross weight of any combination of vehicles exceeding two hundred thousand
pounds shall be submitted in writing to the department of transportation at
least thirty days in advance of the proposed movement.

---
END ---