BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF
WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec.
1. A new section is added
to chapter 77.60 RCW to read as follows:

(1) The department
shall initiate a pilot project to evaluate the feasibility and potential of
intensively culturing shellfish on currently nonproductive oyster reserve land
in Puget Sound. The pilot program shall include no fewer than three long-term
lease agreements with commercial shellfish growers.

(2) The department
shall form one advisory committee each for the Willapa Bay oyster reserve lands
and the Puget Sound oyster reserve lands. The advisory committees shall make
recommendations on management practices to conserve, protect, and develop
oyster reserve lands. The advisory committees may make recommendations
regarding the management practices on oyster reserve lands, in particular to
ensure that they are managed in a manner that will: (a) Increase revenue
through production of high-value shellfish; (b) not be detrimental to the
market for shellfish grown on nonreserve lands; and (c) avoid negative impacts
to existing shellfish populations. The advisory committees may also make
recommendation on the distribution of funds in RCW 77.12.170(1)(k)(i). The
department shall attempt to structure each advisory committee to include equal
representation between shellfish growers that participate in reserve sales and
shellfish growers that do not.

(3) The department
shall submit a brief progress report on the status of the pilot programs to the
appropriate standing committees of the legislature by January 7, 2003.

(4) The department of
natural resources, in consultation with the department of fish and wildlife,
shall administer the leases for oyster reserves entered into under this
chapter. In administering the leases, the department of natural resources
shall exercise its authority under RCW 79.96.090. Vacation of state oyster
reserves by the department of fish and wildlife shall not be a requirement for
the department of natural resources to lease any oyster reserves under this
section. The department of natural resources may recover reasonable costs
directly associated with the administration of the leases for oyster reserves
entered into under this chapter. All administrative fees collected by the
department of natural resources pursuant to this section shall be deposited
into the resource management cost account established in RCW 79.64.020. The
department of fish and wildlife may not assess charges to recover the costs of
consulting with the department of natural resources under this subsection.

(5) The Puget Sound
pilot program shall not include the culture of geoduck.

(6) All receipts from
revenues from the lease of land or sale of shellfish from oyster reserve lands
must be deposited in the state wildlife fund established under RCW 77.12.170.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
2. A new section is added
to chapter 90.71 RCW to read as follows:

(1) The action team
shall establish a shellfish - on-site sewage grant program in Puget Sound and
for Pacific and Grays Harbor counties. The action team shall provide funds to
local health jurisdictions to be used as grants to individuals for improving
their on-site sewage systems. The grants may be provided only in areas that
have the potential to adversely affect water quality in commercial and recreational
shellfish growing areas. A recipient of a grant shall enter into an agreement
with the appropriate local health jurisdiction to maintain the improved on-site
sewage system according to specifications required by the local health
jurisdiction. The action team shall work closely with local health
jurisdictions and shall endeavor to attain geographic equity between Willapa
Bay and the Puget Sound when making funds available under this program. For
the purposes of this subsection, "geographic equity" means issuing
on-site sewage grants at a level that matches the funds generated from the
oyster reserve lands in that area.

(2) In the Puget Sound,
the action team shall give first priority to areas that are:

(a) Identified as
"areas of special concern" under WAC 246-272-01001; or

(b) Included within a
shellfish protection district under chapter 90.72 RCW.

(3) In Grays Harbor and
Pacific counties, the action team shall give first priority to preventing the
deterioration of water quality in areas where commercial or recreational
shellfish are grown.

(4) The action team and
each participating local health jurisdiction shall enter into a memorandum of
understanding that will establish an applicant income eligibility requirement
for individual grant applicants from within the jurisdiction and other mutually
agreeable terms and conditions of the grant program.

(5) The action team may
recover the costs to administer this program not to exceed ten percent of the
shellfish - on-site sewage grant program.

(6) For the 2001-2003
biennium, the action team may use up to fifty percent of the shellfish -
on-site sewage grant program funds for grants to local health jurisdictions to
establish areas of special concern under WAC 246-272-01001, or for operation
and maintenance programs therein, where commercial and recreational uses are
present.

Sec. 3. RCW 79.96.110 and 2000 c
11 s 30 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) In ((case
the director of)) the event that the fish and wildlife commission
approves the vacation of the whole or any part of ((said)) a
reserve, the department of natural resources may vacate and offer for lease
such parts or all of ((said)) the reserve as it deems to be for
the best interest of the state, and all moneys received for the lease of such
lands shall be paid to the department of natural resources((: PROVIDED,
That nothing in RCW 79.96.090 through 79.96.110 shall be construed as authorizing
the lease of any tidelands which have heretofore, or which may hereafter, be
set aside as)).

(2) Notwithstanding
RCW 77.60.020, subsection (1) of this section, or any other provision of state
law, the state oyster reserves in Eld Inlet, Hammersley Inlet, or Totten
Inlet, situated in Mason or Thurston counties((: PROVIDED FURTHER, That any
portion of Plat 138, Clifton's Oyster Reserve, which has already been vacated,
may be leased by the department)) shall permanently be designated as
state oyster reserve lands.

Sec. 4. RCW 77.12.170 and 2000 c
107 s 216 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) There is
established in the state treasury the state wildlife fund which consists of
moneys received from:

(a) Rentals or concessions
of the department;

(b) The sale of real or
personal property held for department purposes;

(c) The sale of
licenses, permits, tags, stamps, and punchcards required by this title, except
annual resident adult saltwater and all shellfish licenses, which shall be
deposited into the state general fund;

(d) Fees for
informational materials published by the department;

(e) Fees for
personalized vehicle license plates as provided in chapter 46.16 RCW;

(f) Articles or
wildlife sold by the director under this title;

(g) Compensation for
damage to department property or wildlife losses or contributions, gifts, or
grants received under RCW 77.12.320 or 77.32.380;

(h) Excise tax on
anadromous game fish collected under chapter 82.27 RCW;

(i) The sale of
personal property seized by the department for food fish, shellfish, or
wildlife violations; ((and))

(j) The department's
share of revenues from auctions and raffles authorized by the commission;
and

(k) All receipts
from revenues from the lease of land or sale of shellfish from oyster reserve
lands under section 1 of this act. Revenues deposited into the fund pursuant
to this subsection (1)(k) may only be expended in the following manner:

(i) Up to forty
percent for the management expenses incurred by the department that are
directly attributable to the management of the oyster reserve lands and for the
expenses associated with new research and development activities at the Pt.
Whitney and Nahcotta shellfish laboratories managed by the department. As used
in this subsection (1)(k)(i), "new research and development
activities" includes an emphasis on the control of aquatic nuisance
species and burrowing shrimp;

(ii) Up to ten
percent may be deposited into the state general fund; and

(iii) All remaining
revenues deposited into the fund pursuant to this subsection (1)(k) shall be
used for the shellfish - on-site sewage grant program established in section 2
of this act.

(2) State
and county officers receiving any moneys listed in subsection (1) of this
section shall deposit them in the state treasury to be credited to the state
wildlife fund.

---
END ---