BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF
WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec.
1. (1) The legislature finds
that:

(a) The United States
department of health and human services, which administers medicaid funding,
has announced that one of its goals is to integrate people with developmental
disabilities into the social mainstream, with equal opportunities and the
chance to make choices.

(b) The health care
financing administration is urging states to develop plans that strengthen
support systems and to actively involve people with disabilities and their
families in the design, development, and implementation of these plans.

(c) The Washington
state division of developmental disabilities strategies for the future
stakeholder work group, as directed by the legislature under RCW 71A.12.180,
developed recommendations for restructuring the delivery system to create one
that is based on an individual choice and self-determination service delivery
philosophy.

(d) There are presently
over five thousand persons in the state of Washington with developmental
disabilities who are in need of housing, including residential placement
services.

(e) Many families of
developmentally disabled persons are in need of additional services in the areas
of residential support, community relationships, peer development, job
training, and other ancillary activities to improve the quality of life and
service, and these needs cannot be met under current budgetary allocations.
These families are not only asking for assistance, they are also asking to be
an integral part of the planning process that affects their loved ones.

(2) It is the intent of
the legislature to authorize the secretary of social and health services to
develop and coordinate a pilot project to expand service options and support
services to persons with developmental disabilities and to serve as a model of
private and public funding coming together to offer individualized options to
individuals and families who desire to be partners in developing supports.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
2. (1) The secretary of
social and health services shall develop and coordinate a pilot project under
which the department contracts with an agency provider to administer funds
necessary for supports and services, including residential placement, for twenty
eligible persons with developmental disabilities. The purpose of the pilot
project is to:

(a) Provide services
for persons with developmental disabilities through a special public-private
partnership that is based on the principles of self-directed/person-centered
supports and that uses public and private dollars as the funding source;

(b) In cooperation with
providers, establish and develop services for persons with developmental
disabilities through regionally administered programs;

(c) Augment the limited
resources of the state to provide a stable, secure, and more encompassing
provision of services and supports;

(d) Expand service
options to people with developmental disabilities; and

(e) Demonstrate a
person-centered, community-based, individually budgeted model for developing
and delivering service and support.

(2)(a) The pilot
project must be based on a service delivery model that is designed and
administered according to the needs of the individuals. All individuals to be
served must meet the criteria for services established by the division of
developmental disabilities and must be assessed using a person-centered
planning process. The pilot project shall provide services to eligible persons
with developmental disabilities. The eligible persons shall be representative
of the spectrum of service needs found amongst persons with developmental
disabilities. All persons who meet the division of developmental disabilities
criteria for service must be considered regardless of disability, age, race,
religious affiliation, gender, socioeconomic status, or marital status.

(b) Based on the
person-centered assessment and service planning process, each participant is to
be provided the residential option necessary to meet his or her individual
needs.

(c) Individuals
participating in the pilot project shall receive only those services that they
need and want. In accordance with each individual plan, participants shall
choose providers to meet their individual service needs. Services to be
provided include, but are not limited to, any or all of the following:

(i) Health and medical
care;

(ii) Transportation;

(iii) Personal hygiene;

(iv) Meal planning and
preparation;

(v) Housekeeping;

(vi) Budgeting and
personal finance;

(vii) Home maintenance;

(viii) Supported
employment supports;

(ix) Recreation and
leisure planning;

(x) Community access
and involvement;

(xi) Self-advocacy; and

(xii) Family support.

(3) The department of
social and health services shall measure and monitor the quality of service
provided under the pilot project. Quality of service must be in compliance
with state and federal law.

(4) The department
shall evaluate the pilot project and make an initial report of its findings and
conclusions to the legislature by December 1, 2002, and a final report by
December 1, 2003.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
3. (1) The sum of three
hundred sixty thousand dollars from the state general fund and the sum of three
hundred sixty-eight thousand dollars in federal funds, or as much thereof as
may be necessary, is appropriated for the fiscal year ending June 30, 2002, to
the department of social and health services to establish a pilot project as
provided in section 2 of this act in Region V.

(2) The
sum of five hundred seventeen thousand dollars from the state general fund and
the sum of five hundred twenty-five thousand dollars in federal funds, or as
much thereof as may be necessary, is appropriated for the fiscal year ending
June 30, 2003, to the department of social and health services to establish a
pilot project as provided in section 2 of this act in Region V.

---
END ---