BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF
WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec.
1. A new section is added
to chapter 43.330 RCW to read as follows:

(1) The department of
community, trade, and economic development shall distribute grants to eligible
nonprofit organizations and community and technical colleges, as defined in
chapter 28B.50 RCW, to develop entrepreneurial-oriented educational programs
targeted to individuals that are recipients of temporary assistance for needy
families under chapter 74.12 RCW.

(2) Eligibility for
grants under this section shall be limited to nonprofit organizations and
community and technical colleges that:

(a) Offer courses or
training that create new business opportunities by providing a basic
understanding and knowledge of entrepreneurship; and

(b)(i) Place
participants in internships in entrepreneurial companies to observe real-world
application of their classroom instruction in a business environment, with a
project-specific assignment; or (ii) place participants with academic training
in businesses that need specific expertise.

(3) The department of
community, trade, and economic development shall coordinate its entrepreneurial
assistance to recipients of temporary assistance for needy families under RCW
43.330.145 with participants in the entrepreneurial-oriented educational
programs funded in this section.

(4) The department of
community, trade, and economic development may provide grants up to two hundred
thousand dollars per year to eligible nonprofit organizations and community and
technical colleges.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
2. The sum of five hundred
thousand dollars, or as much thereof as may be necessary, is appropriated for
the fiscal year ending June 30, 2002, from the general fund to the department
of community, trade, and economic development for the purposes of section 1 of
this act.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 3. The sum of five hundred
thousand dollars, or as much thereof as may be necessary, is appropriated for
the fiscal year ending June 30, 2003, from the general fund to the department
of community, trade, and economic development for the purposes of section 1 of
this act.

---
END ---