BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF
WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1. RCW 58.17.020 and 1995 c
32 s 2 are each amended to read as follows:

As used in this
chapter, unless the context or subject matter clearly requires otherwise, the
words or phrases defined in this section shall have the indicated meanings.

(1)
"Subdivision" is the division or redivision of land into five or more
lots, tracts, parcels, sites, or divisions for the purpose of sale,
lease, or transfer of ownership, except as provided in subsection (6) of this
section.

(2) "Plat" is
a map or representation of a subdivision, showing thereon the division of a
tract or parcel of land into lots, blocks, streets and alleys, or other
divisions and dedications.

(3) "Dedication"
is the deliberate appropriation of land by an owner for any general and public
uses, reserving to himself or herself no other rights than such as are
compatible with the full exercise and enjoyment of the public uses to which the
property has been devoted. The intention to dedicate shall be evidenced by the
owner by the presentment for filing of a final plat or short plat showing the
dedication thereon; and, the acceptance by the public shall be evidenced by the
approval of such plat for filing by the appropriate governmental unit.

A dedication of an area
of less than two acres for use as a public park may include a designation of a
name for the park, in honor of a deceased individual of good character.

(4) "Preliminary
plat" is a neat and approximate drawing of a proposed subdivision showing
the general layout of streets and alleys, lots, blocks, and other elements of a
subdivision consistent with the requirements of this chapter. The preliminary
plat shall be the basis for the approval or disapproval of the general layout
of a subdivision.

(5) "Final
plat" is the final drawing of the subdivision and dedication prepared for
filing for record with the county auditor and containing all elements and
requirements set forth in this chapter and in local regulations adopted under
this chapter.

(6) "Short
subdivision" is the division or redivision of land into four or fewer
lots, tracts, parcels, sites, or divisions for the purpose of sale,
lease, or transfer of ownership((: PROVIDED, That)). However,
the legislative authority of any city or town may by local ordinance increase
the number of lots, tracts, or parcels to be regulated as short subdivisions to
a maximum of nine. The legislative authority of any county planning under
RCW 36.70A.040 that has adopted a comprehensive plan and development
regulations in compliance with chapter 36.70A RCW may by ordinance increase the
number of lots, tracts, or parcels to be regulated as short subdivisions to a
maximum of nine in any urban growth area.

(7) "Binding site
plan" means a drawing to a scale specified by local ordinance which: (a)
Identifies and shows the areas and locations of all streets, roads,
improvements, utilities, open spaces, and any other matters specified by local
regulations; (b) contains inscriptions or attachments setting forth such
appropriate limitations and conditions for the use of the land as are
established by the local government body having authority to approve the site
plan; and (c) contains provisions making any development be in conformity with
the site plan.

(8) "Short
plat" is the map or representation of a short subdivision.

(9) "Lot" is
a fractional part of divided lands having fixed boundaries, being of sufficient
area and dimension to meet minimum zoning requirements for width and area. The
term shall include tracts or parcels.

(10) "Block"
is a group of lots, tracts, or parcels within well defined and fixed
boundaries.

(11) "County
treasurer" shall be as defined in chapter 36.29 RCW or the office or
person assigned such duties under a county charter.

(12) "County
auditor" shall be as defined in chapter 36.22 RCW or the office or person
assigned such duties under a county charter.

(13) "County road
engineer" shall be as defined in chapter 36.40 RCW or the office or person
assigned such duties under a county charter.

(14) "Planning
commission" means that body as defined in chapter((s)) 36.70,
35.63, or 35A.63 RCW as designated by the legislative body to perform a
planning function or that body assigned such duties and responsibilities under
a city or county charter.

(15)
"County commissioner" shall be as defined in chapter 36.32 RCW or the
body assigned such duties under a county charter.

--- END ---