BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF
WASHINGTON:

_8 NEW SECTION. Sec. 1. The legislature
recognizes that more than

_9 four hundred sixty-eight governmental entities have
authority for

10 transportation planning, funding, management, and
construction in

11 Washington state. The legislature also recognizes the
need for and

12 importance of accountability and efficiency in state

13 government. The legislature further recognizes that a
lack of

14 governmental coordination among jurisdictions creates an
inability

15 to provide an integrated transportation system.
Therefore, it is

16 the intent of the legislature to create a single point
of

17 accountability at the state level to monitor and analyze
the

18 performance of the state's transportation system and
ensure that

p. 1 HB
1664

_1 statewide transportation benchmarks are achieved. It is
the further

_2 intent of the legislature to authorize the governor to
appoint the

_3 secretary of transportation and establish a new
transportation

_4 accountability commission, which will replace the
Washington

_5 transportation commission.

_6 Sec. 2. RCW
47.01.021 and 1977 ex.s. c 151 s 2 are each amended to

_7 read as follows:

_8 As used in this title unless the context indicates
otherwise:

_9 (1) "Department" means the department of
transportation created

10 in RCW 47.01.031;

11 (2) "Commission" means the transportation accountability

12 commission created in ((RCW 47.01.051)) section
4 of this act;

13 (3) "Secretary" means the secretary of
transportation as

14 provided for in RCW 47.01.041.

15 NEW SECTION. Sec. 3. A new section is
added to chapter 47.01

16 RCW to read as follows:

17 The department has the following functions, powers,
and duties:

18 (1) To propose policies to be adopted by the
legislature

19 designed to assure the development and maintenance of a

20 comprehensive and balanced statewide transportation
system that

21 will meet the needs of the people of this state for safe
and

22 efficient transportation services. Wherever appropriate
the

23 policies will provide for the use of integrated,
intermodal

24 transportation systems to implement the social,
economic, and

25 environmental policies, goals, and objectives of the
people of the

26 state, and especially to conserve nonrenewable natural
resources

27 including land and energy. To this end, the department
shall:

28 (a) Develop transportation policies that are based
on the

29 policies, goals, and objectives expressed and inherent
in state

30 laws and the transportation accountability commission's

31 transportation benchmarks; and

32 (b) Inventory the adopted policies, goals, and
objectives of

33 the local and areawide governmental bodies of the state
and define

34 the role of the state, regional, and local governments
in

35 determining transportation policies, in transportation
planning,

36 and in implementing the state transportation plan.

HB 1664 p. 2

_1 (2) To prepare and submit a comprehensive and
balanced

_2 statewide transportation plan to the legislative
transportation

_3 committee and to the house and senate standing
committees on

_4 transportation, that must be based on the transportation
policy

_5 adopted by the legislature, the benchmarks adopted by
the

_6 transportation accountability commission, and applicable
state and

_7 federal laws. The plan must take into account federal
law and

_8 regulations relating to the planning, construction, and
operation

_9 of transportation facilities. The plan must be reviewed
and revised

10 before each regular session of the legislature during an
even-

11 numbered year.

12 (3) To establish the policy of the state on each of
the

13 following items:

14 (a) To provide for the effective coordination of
state

15 transportation planning with national transportation
policy, state

16 and local land use policies, and local and regional
transportation

17 plans and programs;

18 (b) To provide for public involvement in
transportation

19 designed to elicit the public's views both with respect
to

20 adequate transportation services and appropriate means
of

21 minimizing adverse social, economic, environmental, and
energy

22 impact of transportation programs;

23 (c) To integrate the statewide transportation plan
with the

24 needs of the elderly and handicapped, and to coordinate
federal

25 and state programs directed at assisting local
governments to

26 answer those needs;

27 (d) To provide for the administration of grants in
aid and

28 other financial assistance to counties and municipal
corporations

29 for transportation purposes; and

30 (e) To provide for the management, sale, and lease
of property

31 or property rights owned by the department that are not
required

32 for transportation purposes.

33 (4) To approve and propose to the governor before
the convening

34 of each regular session during an odd-numbered year a
recommended

35 budget for the operation of the department and for
carrying out

36 the program of the department for the ensuing biennium.
The

37 proposed budget must separately state the appropriations
to be

38 made from the motor vehicle fund for highway purposes in

p. 3 HB
1664

_1 accordance with constitutional limitations and
appropriations and

_2 expenditures to be made from the general fund, or
accounts

_3 thereof, and other available sources for other
operations of the

_4 department.

_5 (5) To approve the issuance and sale of all bonds
authorized by

_6 the legislature for capital construction of state
highways, toll

_7 facilities, Columbia Basin county roads (for which
reimbursement

_8 to the motor vehicle fund has been provided), urban
arterial

_9 projects, and aviation facilities.

10 (6) To adopt such rules and policy directives as may
be

11 necessary to carry out reasonably and properly those
functions

12 expressly vested in the department by statute.

13 NEW SECTION. Sec. 4. A new section is
added to chapter 47.01

14 RCW to read as follows:

15 The transportation accountability commission is
created, to

16 consist of nine members appointed by the governor, with
the

17 consent of the senate. The seven members of the
transportation

18 commission on the effective date of this act will serve
as seven

19 initial members of the transportation accountability
commission

20 until their terms of office as transportation
commissioners

21 expire. The additional two members of the transportation

22 accountability commission will be appointed for initial
terms to

23 expire on June 30, 2006, and June 30, 2007. Thereafter
all terms

24 are for six years. No elective state officer or state
employee may

25 be a member of the commission, and not more than five
members of

26 the commission may at the time of appointment or
thereafter during

27 their respective terms of office be members of the same
major

28 political party. At the time of appointment or thereafter
during

29 their respective terms of office, six members of the
commission

30 must reside in the western part of the state and three
members

31 must reside in the eastern part of the state as divided
north and

32 south by the crest of the Cascade mountain range. No
more than two

33 members of the commission may reside in the same
county. The

34 governor may not remove commissioners from office before
the

35 expiration of their terms unless for a disqualifying
change of

36 residence or for cause based upon a determination of
incapacity,

37 incompetence, neglect of duty, or malfeasance in office
by the

HB 1664 p. 4

_1 Thurston county superior court, upon petition and show
cause

_2 proceedings brought for that purpose in that court and
directed to

_3 the commissioner in question. No member may be
appointed for more

_4 than two consecutive terms.

_5 NEW SECTION. Sec. 5. A new section is
added to chapter 47.01

_6 RCW to read as follows:

_7 The transportation accountability commission shall
meet at such

_8 times as it deems advisable but at least once every
month. It may

_9 adopt its own rules and may establish its own
procedures. It shall

10 act collectively in harmony with recorded resolutions or
motions

11 adopted by the majority vote of at least five members.
The

12 commission may employ an executive director and other
staff as

13 necessary, and shall elect one of its members as the
chair for a

14 term of one year. The chair may vote on all matters
before the

15 commission.

16 Each member of the commission will be compensated in
accordance

17 with RCW 43.03.250 and reimbursed for actual necessary
traveling

18 and other expenses in going to, attending, and returning
from

19 meetings of the commission or that are incurred in the
discharge

20 of duties requested by the chair. However, in no event
may a

21 commissioner be compensated in any year for more than
one hundred

22 twenty days, except the chair of the commission may be
compensated

23 for not more than one hundred fifty days. Service on
the commission

24 does not qualify as service credit for the purposes of a
public

25 retirement system.

26 NEW SECTION. Sec. 6. A new section is
added to chapter 47.01

27 RCW to read as follows:

28 The transportation accountability commission shall
serve as a

29 single, independent, statewide point of accountability
for

30 reporting and monitoring the performance of an integrated

31 transportation system. The commission has the following
functions,

32 powers, and duties:

33 (1) Take responsibility for overseeing the
attainment of

34 benchmarks adopted by the blue ribbon commission on
transportation

35 on November 29, 2000, and make changes to current
benchmarks or

36 set new transportation benchmarks when appropriate;

p. 5 HB
1664

_1 (2) Report annually to the governor and the
legislature on:

_2 (a) Progress toward achieving reform and
efficiencies;

_3 (b) Progress toward accomplishment of the
legislature's adopted

_4 investment strategies; and

_5 (c) Policy proposals for furthering progress toward
benchmarks

_6 and related transportation policies;

_7 (3) Review regional and integrated statewide
transportation

_8 plans and budgets and advise local and state entities on
whether

_9 those plans and budgets are consistent with statewide

10 transportation benchmarks;

11 (4) Monitor and report the efforts at the state,
city, county,

12 and transit district levels on adopting leading edge

13 transportation strategies and achieving transportation
benchmarks.

14 Sec. 7. RCW
43.17.020 and 1995 1st sp.s. c 2 s 2 are each amended

15 to read as follows:

16 There shall be a chief executive officer of each
department to

17 be known as: (1) The secretary of social and health
services, (2)

18 the director of ecology, (3) the director of labor and
industries,

19 (4) the director of agriculture, (5) the director of
fish and

20 wildlife, (6) the secretary of transportation, (7) the
director of

21 licensing, (8) the director of general administration,
(9) the

22 director of community, trade, and economic development,
(10) the

23 director of veterans affairs, (11) the director of
revenue, (12)

24 the director of retirement systems, (13) the secretary
of

25 corrections, ((and)) (14) the secretary of
health, and (15) the

26 director of financial institutions.

27 Such officers, except the ((secretary of
transportation and

28 the)) director of fish and wildlife, shall be
appointed by the

29 governor, with the consent of the senate, and hold
office at the

30 pleasure of the governor. ((The secretary of
transportation shall

31 be appointed by the transportation commission as
prescribed by RCW

32 47.01.041.)) The director of fish and wildlife
shall be appointed

33 by the fish and wildlife commission as prescribed by RCW

34 77.04.055.

35 Sec. 8. RCW
47.01.041 and 1983 1st ex.s. c 53 s 28 are each

36 amended to read as follows:

HB 1664 p. 6

_1 The executive head of the department of
transportation shall be

_2 the secretary of transportation, who shall be appointed
by the

_3 ((transportation commission, and)) governor
with the consent of

_4 the senate. The secretary shall be paid a salary
to be fixed by the

_5 governor in accordance with the provisions of RCW
43.03.040. The

_6 secretary ((shall be an ex officio member of the
commission

_7 without a vote. The secretary shall be the chief
executive officer

_8 of the commission and be responsible to it, and shall
be guided by

_9 policies established by it. The secretary shall
serve until removed

10 by the commission, but only for incapacity,
incompetence, neglect

11 of duty, malfeasance in office, or failure to carry
out the

12 commission's policies. Before a motion for dismissal
shall be acted

13 on by the commission, the secretary shall be granted
a hearing on

14 formal written charges before the full commission.
An action by the

15 commission to remove the secretary shall be final))
serves at the

16 pleasure of the governor.

17 Sec. 9. RCW
47.01.101 and 1987 c 505 s 48 and 1987 c 179 s 1 are

18 each reenacted and amended to read as follows:

19 The secretary shall have the authority and it shall
be his or

20 her duty, subject to policy guidance from the ((commission))

21 governor:

22 (1) To serve as chief executive officer of the
department with

23 full administrative authority to direct all its
activities;

24 (2) To organize the department as he or she may deem
necessary

25 to carry out the work and responsibilities of the
department

26 effectively;

27 (3) To designate and establish such transportation
district or

28 branch offices as may be necessary or convenient, and to
appoint

29 assistants and delegate any powers, duties, and
functions to them

30 or any officer or employee of the department as deemed
necessary

31 to administer the department efficiently;

32 (4) To direct and coordinate the programs of the
various

33 divisions of the department to assure that they achieve
the

34 greatest possible mutual benefit, produce a balanced
overall

35 effort, and eliminate unnecessary duplication of
activity;

36 (5) To adopt all department rules that are subject
to the

p. 7 HB
1664

_1 adoption procedures contained in the state Administrative
Procedure

_2 Act((, except rules subject to adoption by the
commission pursuant

_3 to statute));

_4 (6) To maintain and safeguard the official records
of the

_5 department((, including the commission's recorded
resolutions and

_6 orders));

_7 (7) ((To provide full staff support to the
commission to assist

_8 it in carrying out its functions, powers, and duties
and to

_9 execute the policy established by the commission
pursuant to its

10 legislative authority;

11 (8))) To execute and implement the biennial
operating budget

12 for the operation of the department in accordance with
chapter

13 43.88 RCW and with legislative appropriation and, in
such manner

14 as prescribed therein, to make and report to the ((commission))

15 governor and the chairs of the transportation
committees of the

16 senate and house of representatives, including one copy
to the

17 staff of each of the committees, deviations from the
planned

18 biennial category A and H highway construction programs
necessary

19 to adjust to unexpected delays or other unanticipated

20 circumstances((.));

21 (((9))) (8) To exercise all other
powers and perform all other

22 duties as are now or hereafter provided by law.

23 NEW SECTION. Sec. 10. A new section is
added to chapter 47.01

24 RCW to read as follows:

25 All references in the Revised Code of Washington to
the

26 transportation commission that assign committee
membership, or

27 administrative or policy-making authority, are
transferred to the

28 secretary of transportation.

29 NEW SECTION. Sec. 11. The
following acts or parts of acts are each

30 repealed:

31 (1) RCW 47.01.051 (Commission
created‑-Appointment of members‑-

32 Terms‑-Qualifications‑-Removal) and 1977
ex.s. c 151 s 5;

33 (2) RCW 47.01.061 (Commission‑-Procedures
and internal operations)

34 and 1987 c 364 s 2, 1984 c 287 s 94, 1983 1st ex.s. c 53
s 29,

35 1981 c 59 s 1, & 1977 ex.s. c 151 s 6; and

HB 1664 p. 8

_1 (3) RCW 47.01.070 (Director's and
commissioner's prior assignments

_2 may be delegated) and 1977 ex.s. c 151 s 27 & 1961 c
13 s

_3 47.01.070.

_4 NEW SECTION. Sec. 12. This act takes
effect July 1, 2002.

‑‑‑ END ‑‑‑

p. 9 HB
1664