BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF
WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec.
1. The legislature finds
that roads, streets, bridges, and highways in the state represent public assets
worth over one hundred billion dollars. These investments require regular
maintenance and preservation, or rehabilitation, to provide cost-effective
transportation services. Many of these facilities are in poor condition.
Given the magnitude of public investment and the importance of safe, reliable
roadways to the motoring public, the legislature intends to create stronger
accountability to ensure that cost-effective maintenance and preservation is
provided for these transportation facilities.

Sec. 2. RCW 35.84.060 and 1969
ex.s. c 281 s 26 are each amended to read as follows:

Every municipal
corporation which owns or operates an urban public transportation system as
defined in RCW 47.04.082 within its corporate limits, may acquire, construct,
extend, own, or operate such urban public transportation system to any
point or points not to exceed fifteen miles outside of its corporate limits:
PROVIDED, That no municipal corporation shall extend its urban public
transportation system beyond its corporate limits to operate in any territory
already served by a privately operated auto transportation company holding a
certificate of public convenience and necessity from the utilities and
transportation commission.

As a condition of
receiving state funding, the municipal corporation shall submit a maintenance
and preservation management plan for certification by the transportation
commission or its successor entity. The plan must inventory all transportation
system assets within the direction and control of the municipality, and provide
a plan for maintenance, preservation, and, where appropriate, replacement of
assets based on lowest life cycle cost methodologies.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
3. A new section is added
to chapter 36.56 RCW to read as follows:

As a condition of
receiving state funding, a county that has assumed the transportation functions
of a metropolitan municipal corporation shall submit a maintenance and
preservation management plan for certification by the transportation commission
or its successor entity. The plan must inventory all transportation system
assets within the direction and control of the county, and provide a plan for
maintenance, preservation, and, where appropriate, replacement of assets based
on lowest life cycle cost methodologies.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
4. A new section is added
to chapter 36.57 RCW to read as follows:

As a condition of
receiving state funding, a county public transportation authority shall submit
a maintenance and preservation management plan for certification by the
transportation commission or its successor entity. The plan must inventory all
assets within the direction and control of the authority, and provide a plan
for maintenance, preservation, and, where appropriate, replacement of assets
based on lowest life cycle cost methodologies.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
5. A new section is added
to chapter 36.57A RCW to read as follows:

As a condition of
receiving state funding, a public transportation benefit area authority shall
submit a maintenance and preservation management plan for certification by the
transportation commission or its successor entity. The plan must inventory all
assets within the direction and control of the authority, and provide a plan
for maintenance, preservation, and, where appropriate, replacement of assets
based on lowest life cycle cost methodologies.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
6. A new section is added
to chapter 46.68 RCW to read as follows:

The distributions
specified in RCW 46.68.090(1) (i) and (j) are subject to the following
conditions: Counties, cities, and towns must submit a plan to the
transportation commission or its successor entity, demonstrating use of
maintenance management systems and pavement management systems. The commission
will certify use of adequate maintenance management systems and pavement
management systems for counties, cities, and towns only if (1) the maintenance
management system proposed by the relevant jurisdiction provides for a uniform
service level of C+ or better, as defined in the maintenance accountability
process (MAP) manual of the state department of transportation; and (2) an
inventory of facilities and a corresponding pavement management system using
lowest life cycle cost principles is submitted by each relevant jurisdiction.

Sec. 7. RCW 47.06.050 and 1993 c
446 s 5 are each amended to read as follows:

The state-owned
facilities component of the statewide transportation plan shall consist of:

(1) The state highway
system plan, which identifies program and financing needs and recommends
specific and financially realistic improvements to preserve the structural
integrity of the state highway system, ensure acceptable operating conditions,
and provide for enhanced access to scenic, recreational, and cultural
resources. The state highway system plan shall contain the following elements:

(a) A system preservation
element, which shall establish structural preservation objectives for the state
highway system including bridges, identify current and future structural
deficiencies based upon analysis of current conditions and projected future
deterioration, and recommend program funding levels and specific actions
necessary to preserve the structural integrity of the state highway system
consistent with adopted objectives. Lowest life cycle cost methodologies
must be used in developing a pavement management system. This element
shall serve as the basis for the preservation component of the six-year highway
program and the two-year biennial budget request to the legislature;

(b) A highway
maintenance element, which shall ensure a service level of C+ or better on all
state-owned highways. This element will serve as the basis for the
preservation component of the six-year highway program and the two-year
biennial budget request to the legislature;

(c) A capacity
and operational improvement element, which shall establish operational
objectives, including safety considerations, for moving people and goods on the
state highway system, identify current and future capacity, operational, and
safety deficiencies, and recommend program funding levels and specific
improvements and strategies necessary to achieve the operational objectives.
In developing capacity and operational improvement plans the department shall
first assess strategies to enhance the operational efficiency of the existing
system before recommending system expansion. Strategies to enhance the
operational efficiencies include but are not limited to access management,
transportation system management, demand management, and high-occupancy vehicle
facilities. The capacity and operational improvement element must conform to
the state implementation plan for air quality and be consistent with regional
transportation plans adopted under chapter 47.80 RCW, and shall serve as the
basis for the capacity and operational improvement portions of the six-year
highway program and the two-year biennial budget request to the legislature;

(((c))) (d)
A scenic and recreational highways element, which shall identify and recommend
designation of scenic and recreational highways, provide for enhanced access to
scenic, recreational, and cultural resources associated with designated routes,
and recommend a variety of management strategies to protect, preserve, and
enhance these resources. The department, affected counties, cities, and towns,
regional transportation planning organizations, and other state or federal
agencies shall jointly develop this element;

(((d))) (e)
A paths and trails element, which shall identify the needs of nonmotorized
transportation modes on the state transportation systems and provide the basis
for the investment of state transportation funds in paths and trails, including
funding provided under chapter 47.30 RCW.

(2) The state ferry
system plan, which shall guide capital and operating investments in the state
ferry system. The plan shall establish service objectives for state ferry
routes, forecast travel demand for the various markets served in the system, ((and))
develop strategies for ferry system investment that consider regional and
statewide vehicle and passenger needs, support local land use plans, and assure
that ferry services are fully integrated with other transportation services. The
plan must provide for maintenance and preservation of capital assets based on
lowest life cycle cost methodologies. The plan shall assess the role of
private ferries operating under the authority of the utilities and
transportation commission and shall coordinate ferry system capital and
operational plans with these private operations. The ferry system plan must be
consistent with the regional transportation plans for areas served by the state
ferry system, and shall be developed in conjunction with the ferry advisory
committees.

Sec. 8. RCW 47.06.090 and 1993 c
446 s 9 are each amended to read as follows:

The state-interest component
of the statewide multimodal transportation plan shall include an intercity
passenger rail plan, which shall analyze existing intercity passenger rail
service and recommend improvements to that service under the state passenger
rail service program including depot improvements, potential service
extensions, and ways to achieve higher train speeds.

For purposes of
maintaining and preserving any state-owned component of the state's passenger
rail program, the statewide multimodal transportation plan must identify all
such assets and provide a preservation and maintenance plan based on lowest
life cycle cost methodologies.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
9. A new section is added
to chapter 81.112 RCW to read as follows:

As a condition of
receiving state funding, a regional transit authority shall submit a
maintenance and preservation management plan for certification by the
transportation commission or its successor entity. The plan must inventory all
assets within the direction and control of the transit authority, and provide a
plan for maintenance, preservation, and, where appropriate, replacement of
assets based on lowest life cycle cost methodologies.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 10. This act is necessary for
the immediate preservation of the public peace, health, or safety, or support
of the state government and its existing public institutions, and takes effect
July 1, 2001.

---
END ---