BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF
WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1. RCW 47.05.010 and 1993 c
490 s 1 are each amended to read as follows:

The legislature finds
that solutions to state highway deficiencies have become increasingly complex
and diverse and that anticipated transportation revenues will fall
substantially short of the amount required to satisfy all transportation
needs. Difficult investment trade-offs will be required.

It is the intent of the
legislature that investment of state transportation funds to address
deficiencies on the state highway system be based on a policy of ((priority
programming)) cost-benefit analysis having as its basis the rational
selection of projects and services according to factual need and an evaluation
of life cycle costs and benefits and ((which)) that are
systematically scheduled to carry out defined objectives within available
revenue. The state must develop analytic tools to use a common methodology
to measure benefits and costs for all modes.

The ((priority
programming)) cost-benefit analysis system ((shall)) must
ensure preservation of the existing state highway system, relieve
congestion, provide mobility for people and goods, support the state's
economy, and promote environmental protection and energy conservation.

The ((priority
programming)) cost-benefit analysis system ((shall)) must
implement the state-owned highway component of the statewide multimodal
transportation plan, consistent with local and regional transportation plans,
by targeting state transportation investment to appropriate multimodal
solutions ((which)) that address identified state highway system
deficiencies.

The ((priority
programming system)) cost-benefit analysis for improvements ((shall))
must incorporate a broad range of solutions that are identified in the
statewide multimodal transportation plan as appropriate to address state
highway system deficiencies, including but not limited to relieving
congestion, highway expansion, efficiency improvements, nonmotorized
transportation facilities, high occupancy vehicle facilities, transit
facilities and services, rail facilities and services, and transportation
demand management programs.

Sec. 2. RCW 47.05.030 and 1998 c
171 s 6 are each amended to read as follows:

The transportation
commission shall adopt a comprehensive six-year investment program specifying
program objectives and performance measures for the preservation and
improvement programs defined in this section. In the specification of
investment program objectives and performance measures, the transportation
commission, in consultation with the Washington state department of
transportation, shall define and adopt standards for effective programming and
prioritization practices ((including a needs)) using a cost-benefit
analysis process. The ((needs)) analysis process ((shall)) must
ensure the identification of problems and deficiencies, the evaluation of
alternative solutions and trade-offs, and estimations of the costs and benefits
of prospective projects. The investment program ((shall)) must
be revised biennially, effective on July 1st of odd-numbered years. The
investment program ((shall)) must be based upon the needs
identified in the state-owned highway component of the statewide multimodal
transportation plan as defined in RCW 47.01.071(3).

(1) The preservation
program ((shall)) consists of those investments necessary to
preserve the existing state highway system and to restore existing safety
features, giving consideration to lowest life cycle costing. The
preservation program must require use of the most cost-effective pavement
surfaces based on durability. The comprehensive six-year investment
program for preservation ((shall)) must identify projects for two
years and an investment plan for the remaining four years.

(2) The improvement
program ((shall)) consists of investments needed to address
identified deficiencies on the state highway system to ((improve mobility))
relieve congestion, safety, support for the economy, and protection of
the environment. The six-year investment program for improvements ((shall))
must identify projects for two years and major deficiencies proposed to
be addressed in the six-year period giving consideration to relative benefits
and life cycle costing. The transportation commission shall give higher
priority for correcting identified deficiencies on those facilities classified
as facilities of statewide significance as defined in RCW 47.06.140.

The transportation
commission shall approve and present the comprehensive six-year investment
program to the legislature in support of the biennial budget request under RCW
44.40.070 and 44.40.080.

Sec. 3. RCW 47.05.035 and 1993 c
490 s 4 are each amended to read as follows:

The commission shall
develop and use transportation demand modeling tools to evaluate investments.
In developing program objectives and performance measures, the transportation
commission shall evaluate investment trade-offs between the preservation and
improvement programs. In making these investment trade-offs, the commission
shall evaluate, using cost-benefit techniques, roadway and bridge maintenance
activities as compared to roadway and bridge preservation program activities
and adjust those programs accordingly.

The commission shall
allocate the estimated revenue between preservation and improvement programs
giving primary consideration to the following factors:

(1) The relative needs
in each of the programs and the system performance levels that can be achieved
by meeting these needs;

(2) The need to provide
adequate funding for preservation to protect the state's investment in its
existing highway system;

(3) The continuity of
future transportation development with those improvements previously
programmed; and

(4) The
availability of dedicated funds for a specific type of work.

Sec. 4. RCW 47.05.051 and 1998 c
175 s 12 are each amended to read as follows:

The comprehensive
six-year investment program shall be based upon the needs identified in the
state-owned highway component of the statewide multimodal transportation plan
as defined in RCW 47.01.071(3) and priority selection systems that incorporate
the following criteria:

(1) Priority
programming for the preservation program shall take into account the following,
not necessarily in order of importance:

(a) Extending the
service life of the existing highway system, including using the most cost-effective
pavement surfaces available based on durability;

(b) Ensuring the
structural ability to carry loads imposed upon highways and bridges; and

(c) Minimizing life
cycle costs. The transportation commission in carrying out the provisions of
this section may delegate to the department of transportation the authority to
select preservation projects to be included in the six-year program.

(2) Priority
programming for the improvement program shall take into account the following:

(a) Support for the
state's economy, including job creation and job preservation;

(b) The cost-effective
movement of people and goods;

(c) Accident and
accident risk reduction;

(d) Protection of the
state's natural environment;

(e) Continuity and
systematic development of the highway transportation network;

(f) Consistency with
local comprehensive plans developed under chapter 36.70A RCW;

(g) Consistency with
regional transportation plans developed under chapter 47.80 RCW;

(h) Public views
concerning proposed improvements;

(i) The conservation of
energy resources;

(j) Feasibility of
financing the full proposed improvement;

(k) Commitments
established in previous legislative sessions;

(l) Relative costs and
benefits of candidate programs;

(m) Available
transportation demand management policies that could be used to reduce demand
on the highway system;

(n) Major
projects addressing capacity deficiencies which prioritize allowing for
preliminary engineering shall be reprioritized during the succeeding biennium,
based upon updated project data. Reprioritized projects may be delayed or
canceled by the transportation commission if higher priority projects are
awaiting funding; and

(((n))) (o)
Major project approvals which significantly increase a project's scope or cost
from original prioritization estimates shall include a review of the project's
estimated revised priority rank and the level of funding provided. Projects
may be delayed or canceled by the transportation commission if higher priority
projects are awaiting funding.

(3) The commission may
depart from the priority programming established under subsections (1) and (2)
of this section: (a) To the extent that otherwise funds cannot be utilized
feasibly within the program; (b) as may be required by a court judgment,
legally binding agreement, or state and federal laws and regulations; (c) as
may be required to coordinate with federal, local, or other state agency
construction projects; (d) to take advantage of some substantial financial benefit
that may be available; (e) for continuity of route development; or (f) because
of changed financial or physical conditions of an unforeseen or emergent
nature. The commission or secretary of transportation shall maintain in its
files information sufficient to show the extent to which the commission has
departed from the established priority.

(4) The
commission shall identify those projects that yield freight mobility benefits
or that alleviate the impacts of freight mobility upon affected communities.

---
END ---