BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF
WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec.
1. The legislature finds
that substantial pavement damage is caused by studded tire use. Therefore, to
offset pavement maintenance and preservation costs, a surcharge is established
to recognize and to recover the cost of studded tire damage to the roadways.

Sec. 2. RCW 46.37.4216 and 1999
c 219 s 3 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) Beginning
July 1, 2001, a person may not sell a studded tire or sell a stud for
installation in a tire unless the stud qualifies as a lightweight stud under
RCW 46.04.272.

(2)(a) Beginning
July 1, 2001, a fee of fifteen dollars per tire is levied on the sale of each
studded tire, regardless of the wholesale or retail value of the studded tire.

(b) The buyer of the
tire shall pay the fee to the seller, and each seller shall collect from the
buyer the full amount of the fee. Within twenty-five days after the end of the
month in which the fees are collected, the seller shall send the amount of fees
collected from the buyer by the seller to the department of revenue, acting in
a custodial capacity, for deposit in the motor vehicle fund.

(c) Chapter 82.32
RCW applies to the fees imposed by this section. The tax due dates, reporting
periods, and return requirements applicable to chapter 82.04 RCW apply equally
to the fees imposed by this section.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 3. This act is necessary for
the immediate preservation of the public peace, health, or safety, or support
of the state government and its existing public institutions, and takes effect
July 1, 2001.

---
END ---