BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF
WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1. RCW 35.63.060 and 1988 c
127 s 1 are each amended to read as follows:

The commission may act
as the research and fact finding agency of the municipality. To that end it
may make such surveys, analyses, researches and reports as are generally
authorized or requested by its council or board, or by the state with the
approval of its council or board. The commission, upon such request or
authority may also:

(1) Make inquiries,
investigations, and surveys concerning the resources of the county, including but
not limited to the potential for solar energy development and alternative means
to encourage and protect access to direct sunlight for solar energy systems;

(2) Assemble and
analyze the data thus obtained and formulate plans for the conservation of such
resources and the systematic utilization and development thereof;

(3) Make
recommendations from time to time as to the best methods of such conservation,
utilization, and development;

(4) Cooperate with
other commissions and with other public agencies of the municipality, state and
United States in such planning, conservation, and development; and

(5) In particular
cooperate with and aid the state within its territorial limits in the
preparation of the state master plan provided for in RCW 43.21A.350 and in
advance planning of public works programs.

In
carrying out its powers and duties, the commission should demonstrate how land
use planning is integrated with transportation planning.

Sec. 2. RCW 35A.63.060 and 1967
ex.s. c 119 s 35A.63.060 are each amended to read as follows:

Every code
city, by ordinance, shall direct the planning agency to prepare a comprehensive
plan for anticipating and influencing the orderly and coordinated development
of land and building uses of the code city and its environs. The comprehensive
plan may be prepared as a whole or in successive parts. The plan should
integrate transportation and land use planning.

---
END ---