BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF
WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec.
1. The legislature intends
that funding for transportation improvements be allocated to the worst traffic
chokepoints in the state. Furthermore, the legislature intends to fund
projects that provide systemic relief throughout a transportation corridor,
rather than spot improvements that fail to improve overall mobility within a
corridor.

Sec. 2. RCW 47.05.051 and 1998 c
175 s 12 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) The
comprehensive six-year investment program shall be based upon the needs
identified in the state-owned highway component of the statewide multimodal
transportation plan as defined in RCW 47.01.071(3) and priority selection
systems that incorporate the following criteria:

(((1))) (a)
Priority programming for the preservation program shall take into account the
following, not necessarily in order of importance:

(((a))) (i)
Extending the service life of the existing highway system;

(((b))) (ii)
Ensuring the structural ability to carry loads imposed upon highways and
bridges; and

(((c))) (iii)
Minimizing life cycle costs. The transportation commission in carrying out the
provisions of this section may delegate to the department of transportation the
authority to select preservation projects to be included in the six-year
program.

(((2))) (b)
Priority programming for the improvement program ((shall take into account))
must be based primarily upon the following:

(((a))) (i)
Traffic congestion, delay, and accidents;

(ii) Location within
a heavily traveled transportation corridor;

(iii)
Synchronization with other potential transportation projects, including transit
and multimodal projects, within the heavily traveled corridor; and

(iv) Use of
benefit/cost analysis wherever feasible to determine the value of the proposed
project.

(c) Priority
programming for the improvement program may also take into account:

(i) Support for
the state's economy, including job creation and job preservation;

(((b))) (ii)
The cost-effective movement of people and goods;

(((c))) (iii)
Accident and accident risk reduction;

(((d))) (iv)
Protection of the state's natural environment;

(((e))) (v)
Continuity and systematic development of the highway transportation network;

(((f))) (vi)
Consistency with local comprehensive plans developed under chapter 36.70A RCW;

(((g))) (vii)
Consistency with regional transportation plans developed under chapter 47.80
RCW;

(((h))) (viii)
Public views concerning proposed improvements;

(((i))) (ix)
The conservation of energy resources;

(((j))) (x)
Feasibility of financing the full proposed improvement;

(((k))) (xi)
Commitments established in previous legislative sessions;

(((l))) (xii)
Relative costs and benefits of candidate programs((;)).

(((m))) (d)
Major projects addressing capacity deficiencies which prioritize allowing for
preliminary engineering shall be reprioritized during the succeeding biennium,
based upon updated project data. Reprioritized projects may be delayed or
canceled by the transportation commission if higher priority projects are
awaiting funding((; and)).

(((n))) (e)
Major project approvals which significantly increase a project's scope or cost
from original prioritization estimates shall include a review of the project's
estimated revised priority rank and the level of funding provided. Projects
may be delayed or canceled by the transportation commission if higher priority
projects are awaiting funding.

(((3))) (2)
The commission may depart from the priority programming established under
subsection((s)) (1) ((and (2))) of this section: (a) To the
extent that otherwise funds cannot be utilized feasibly within the program; (b)
as may be required by a court judgment, legally binding agreement, or state and
federal laws and regulations; (c) as may be required to coordinate with
federal, local, or other state agency construction projects; (d) to take
advantage of some substantial financial benefit that may be available; (e) for
continuity of route development; or (f) because of changed financial or
physical conditions of an unforeseen or emergent nature. The commission or
secretary of transportation shall maintain in its files information sufficient
to show the extent to which the commission has departed from the established
priority.

(((4))) (3)
The commission shall identify those projects that yield freight mobility
benefits or that alleviate the impacts of freight mobility upon affected
communities.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
3. The transportation
commission or its successor entity shall report the results of its priority
programming under RCW 47.05.051 to the transportation committees of the senate
and house of representatives by October 31, 2001.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 4. This act is necessary for
the immediate preservation of the public peace, health, or safety, or support
of the state government and its existing public institutions, and takes effect
July 1, 2001.

---
END ---