BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF
WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec.
1. A new section is added
to chapter 47.26 RCW to read as follows:

The term "advance
right-of-way acquisition" as used in this chapter means the acquisition of
property and property rights, generally not more than ten years in advance of
programmed roadway construction projects, together with the engineering costs
necessary for the advance right-of-way acquisition. Property or property
rights purchased must be for projects approved by the transportation
improvement board or the county road administration board as part of a city or
county six-year plan or program.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
2. A new section is added
to chapter 47.26 RCW to read as follows:

The city and county
advance right-of-way revolving fund is created in the custody of the
treasurer. The transportation improvement board is the administrator of the
fund and may deposit directly and spend without appropriation an initial
deposit of five million dollars from the motor vehicle fund included in the
transportation improvement board's 2001-2003 budget.

The board shall
distribute the funds to cities and counties approved for advance right-of-way
acquisition funding. The board shall adopt reasonable rules and develop
policies to implement this program. Cities and counties applying for this
funding must, at a minimum, submit the following documentation for the related
arterial construction project: A list of the permits to be acquired; the
agencies requiring the permits; and the estimated time frame for acquiring the
permits. Funding distributions are subject to RCW 47.26.270.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
3. A new section is added
to chapter 47.26 RCW to read as follows:

(1) After any
properties or property rights are acquired through funds from the city and
county advance right-of-way revolving fund, the acquiring city or county is
responsible for the management of the properties in accordance with sound
business practices and shall provide annual status reports to the board. Funds
received by the city or county from the interim management of the properties
must be deposited into the city and county advance right-of-way revolving fund.

(2) When the city or
county proceeds with the construction of an arterial project that will require
the use of any of the property so acquired, the city or county shall reimburse
the city and county advance right-of-way revolving fund. Reimbursement must
reflect the original cost of the acquired property or property rights required
for the project plus an interest rate equal to the current state bond interest
rate. The current state bond interest rate must be reviewed by the board on a
quarterly basis and be adjusted as needed to reflect the current rate at the
time of the quarterly review. The board shall report annually to the
transportation committees of the legislature on the interest rate set.

(3) When the city or
county determines that any properties or property rights acquired through funds
from the city and county advance right-of-way revolving fund will not be
required for an arterial construction project or the property has been held by
the city or county for more than ten years, the city or county shall either
sell the property at fair market value or reimburse the revolving fund at fair
market value. All proceeds of the sale must be deposited in the city and
county advance right-of-way revolving fund.

(4)
Deposits in the fund may be reexpended without further or additional
appropriations.

---
END ---