BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF
WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1. RCW 47.20.750 and 1998 c
195 s 1 are each amended to read as follows:

The legislature finds
and declares that a contracting procedure that facilitates construction of
transportation facilities in a more timely manner may occasionally be needed to
ensure that construction can proceed simultaneously with the design of the
facility. The legislature further finds that the design-build process and
other alternative project delivery concepts achieve the goals of time savings
and avoidance of costly change orders.

Sec. 2. RCW 47.20.755 and 1998 c
195 s 2 are each amended to read as follows:

The department of
transportation shall develop((, by January 1, 1999,)) a process for
awarding competitively bid highway construction contracts for projects over ten
million dollars that may be constructed using a design-build procedure. As
used in this section, "design-build procedure" means a method of
contracting under which the department of transportation contracts with another
party for such party to both design and build the structures, facilities, and
other items specified in the contract.

The
process developed by the department ((shall)) must, at a minimum,
include the scope of services required under the design-build procedure,
contractor prequalification requirements, criteria for evaluating technical
information and project costs, contractor selection criteria, and an issue
resolution procedure. ((If a request for proposal will be used, the
requirements of RCW 39.10.050 (4), (5), and (6) apply.))

Sec. 3. RCW 47.20.765 and 1998 c
195 s 4 are each amended to read as follows:

The department of
transportation may use the design-build procedure for public works projects
over ten million dollars where:

(1) The construction
activities are highly specialized and a design-build approach, as defined in
RCW 47.20.755, is critical in developing the construction methodology; or

(2) The projects
selected provide opportunity for greater innovation and efficiencies between
the designer and the builder; or

(3) Significant savings
in project delivery time would be realized.

Sec. 4. 1998 c 195 s 7
(uncodified) is amended to read as follows:

This act expires April
30, ((2001)) 2008, unless extended by the legislature.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
5. The following acts or
parts of acts are each repealed:

(1) RCW 47.20.760 (Design-build‑‑Other
statutes applicable) and 1998 c 195 s 3; and

(2) RCW 47.20.775
(Design-build--Demonstration projects) and 1998 c 195 s 6.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 6. This act is necessary for
the immediate preservation of the public peace, health, or safety, or support
of the state government and its existing public institutions, and takes effect
immediately.

---
END ---