BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF
WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1. RCW 47.01.260 and 1983 c
29 s 1 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) The department of
transportation shall exercise all the powers and perform all the duties
necessary, convenient, or incidental to the planning, locating, designing,
constructing, improving, repairing, operating, and maintaining state highways,
including bridges and other structures, culverts, and drainage facilities and
channel changes necessary for the protection of state highways, and shall
examine and allow or disallow bills for any work or services performed or
materials, equipment, or supplies furnished.

(2) Subject to the
limitations of RCW 4.24.115, the department, in the exercise of any of its
powers, may include in any authorized contract a provision for indemnifying the
other contracting party against specific loss or damages arising out of the
performance of the contract.

(3) The department is
authorized to acquire property as provided by law and to construct and maintain
thereon any buildings or structures necessary or convenient for the planning,
design, construction, operation, maintenance, and administration of the state
highway system and to acquire property and to construct and maintain any
buildings, structures, appurtenances, and facilities necessary or convenient to
the health and safety and for the accommodation of persons traveling upon state
highways.

(4) The department is
authorized to engage in planning surveys and may collect, compile, and analyze
statistics and other data relative to existing and future highways and highway
needs throughout the state, and shall conduct research, investigations, and
testing as it deems necessary to improve the methods of construction and
maintenance of highways and bridges.

(5) The department
shall incorporate elements of total quality management into its business
practices and place an emphasis on excellence in the workplace, through
service, customer satisfaction, and a focus on results.

(6) The
department shall form partnerships with employer-employee organizations to develop
apprenticeships and training programs to ensure the availability of a skilled
work force to deliver projects and services.

--- END ---