BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF
WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec.
1. A new section is added
to chapter 47.04 RCW to read as follows:

(1) The legislature
finds that managed competition can be an effective way to unleash creative
ideas from the work force and lead to improvements and greater efficiencies for
the department of transportation. Managed competition, however, should
maintain a level playing field between the public and private sectors and
should take into account issues such as wages, health care, and other
benefits. Therefore, the legislature directs the department to introduce a
pilot program, through negotiation between labor and management, that would
provide for managed competition in transportation operations and maintenance
functions and to seek private sector bids to compare with bids from the public
sector staff currently performing the operation or maintenance function. Under
managed competition, the department may purchase any maintenance or operations
function, including those customarily and historically provided by classified
public employees, from any individual, nonprofit organization, business,
employee business unit, or other entity if the following criteria are met:

(a) The invitation for
bid or request for proposal contains measurable standards for the performance
of the contract;

(b) Classified public
employees whose positions or work would be displaced by the contract are
provided an opportunity to offer alternatives to purchasing services by
contract and, if these alternatives are not accepted, compete for the contract
under the process developed in subsection (2) of this section;

(c) The contract with
an entity other than an employee business unit includes a provision requiring
the entity to consider employment of state employees who may be displaced by
the contract;

(d) The department has
established a contract monitoring process to measure contract performance,
costs, service delivery quality, and other contract standards, and to cancel
contracts that do not meet those standards;

(e) The department has
collected data that demonstrates that the contract results in savings or efficiency
improvements. The department must consider the consequences and potential
mitigation of improper or failed performance by the contractor.

(2) The department
shall conduct a three-year managed competition pilot project to commence on
July 1, 2001, and to conclude on June 30, 2004. The department, working
through negotiations with labor and management, shall develop an implementation
process for managed competition that would ensure that bids are submitted and
evaluated in a fair and objective manner. The implementation process must also
be based upon inclusion of the following minimum bid items: (a) Current
certified prevailing wages established by the department of labor and
industries for the classification of work to be performed under the proposed
contract; (b) an overhead factor of not less than sixty-six percent of the base
prevailing wage rates; and (c) equipment charges that reflect the current fair
market value rate. The pilot project may include, but is not limited to, the
following maintenance services: Drainage maintenance and slope repair,
roadside and landscape maintenance, bridge and urban tunnel maintenance, safety
rest area maintenance, and third-party damages and disaster maintenance. The
department shall submit the results of the pilot project to the transportation
committees of the senate and house of representatives by October 1, 2004.

Sec. 2. RCW 41.06.380 and 1979
ex.s. c 46 s 2 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) Nothing
contained in this chapter shall prohibit any department, as defined in RCW
41.06.020, from purchasing services by contract with individuals or business
entities if such services were regularly purchased by valid contract by such
department prior to April 23, 1979: PROVIDED, That no such contract may be
executed or renewed if it would have the effect of terminating classified
employees or classified employee positions existing at the time of the
execution or renewal of the contract.

(2)
This section does not apply to the managed competition pilot project for
operations and maintenance functions of the department of transportation under
section 1 of this act.

---
END ---