BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF
WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1. RCW 47.01.021 and 1977
ex.s. c 151 s 2 are each amended to read as follows:

As used in this title
unless the context indicates otherwise:

(1)
"Department" means the department of transportation created in RCW
47.01.031;

(2)
"Commission" means the transportation commission created in RCW
47.01.051;

(3)
"Secretary" means the secretary of transportation as provided for in
RCW 47.01.041;

(4) "One-stop
permitting" means a consolidated permitting process for all environmental
reviews and permitting of transportation projects;

(5)
"Low-impact development standards" means techniques, technologies, or
strategies that seek to reduce the negative impact of transportation
facilities, projects, and services on communities and the environment, and
promote more efficient and effective use of transportation facilities.
Examples include transportation demand management, transportation system
management, and smart growth.

Sec. 2. RCW 47.01.290 and 1994 c
258 s 3 are each amended to read as follows:

The
legislature recognizes that environmental review of transportation projects is
a continuous process that should begin at the earliest stages of planning and
continue through final project construction. Early and extensive involvement
of the relevant environmental regulatory authorities is critical in order to
avoid significant changes in substantially completed project design and
engineering. Additionally, streamlining the permit approval process is
essential for reducing project delays. It is the expectation of the
legislature that if a comprehensive environmental approach is integrated
throughout various transportation processes, onerous, duplicative, and
time-consuming permit processes will be minimized.

Sec. 3. RCW 47.01.300 and 1994 c
258 s 4 are each amended to read as follows:

The department shall,
in cooperation with environmental regulatory authorities:

(1) Identify and
document environmental resources in the development of the statewide multimodal
plan under RCW 47.06.040;

(2) Allow for public
comment regarding changes to the criteria used for prioritizing projects under
chapter 47.05 RCW before final adoption of the changes by the commission;

(3) Use an
environmental review as part of the project prospectus identifying potential
environmental impacts, mitigation, and costs during the early project
identification and selection phase, submit the prospectus to the relevant
environmental regulatory authorities, and maintain a record of comments and
proposed revisions received from the authorities;

(4) Actively work with
the relevant environmental regulatory authorities during the design alternative
analysis process and seek written concurrence from the authorities that they
agree with the preferred design alternative selected;

(5) Develop a uniform
methodology, in consultation with relevant environmental regulatory
authorities, for submitting plans and specifications detailing project elements
that impact environmental resources, and proposed mitigation measures, to the
relevant environmental regulatory authorities during the preliminary
specifications and engineering phase of project development;

(6) Screen construction
projects to determine which projects will require complex or multiple permits.
The permitting authorities shall develop methods for initiating review of the
permit applications for the projects before the final design of the projects;

(7) Conduct special
prebid meetings for those projects that are environmentally complex; ((and))

(8) Review
environmental considerations related to particular projects during the
preconstruction meeting held with the contractor who is awarded the bid;

(9) Actively seek
delegation of permit authority from the United States Environmental Protection
Agency for section 404 of the federal Clean Water Act. This delegation of
permit authority should be sought only for transportation projects under the
direction of the department;

(10) Actively work
with environmental regulatory authorities to establish standards for
environmental reviews that are consistent among local, county, state, and
federal governmental jurisdictions; and

(11) Actively work
with environmental regulatory authorities to determine and document the issues,
procedures, and factors central to establishing one-stop permitting for major
transportation capital projects. This effort should:

(a) Identify highway
projects of statewide significance to be eligible for one-stop permitting;

(b) Select a
significant highway construction project as a pilot project to be completed in
two years;

(c) Evaluate the use
of planning and permitting standards that encourage low-impact alternatives;
and

(d)
Seek to accelerate the permit process for projects that use low-impact
development standards.

---
END ---