BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF
WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec.
1. It is the intent of the
legislature to ensure that the common schools have adequate numbers of
classroom teachers and other certificated instructional staff. The legislature
finds there are significant disparities in living costs among regions within
the state. The legislature finds that the largest component of these
disparities is the cost of housing, which is significantly higher in certain
areas of the state than in other areas of the state. The legislature finds
that the percentage of salary required to procure housing in these areas is
significantly greater for classroom teachers and other certificated instructional
staff in these areas than in other areas of the state. The legislature further
finds that the cost of housing in these areas in relation to salary
compensation levels has contributed significantly to hardship among school
districts in these areas in ensuring an adequate supply of well-qualified
classroom teachers and other certificated instructional staff. Therefore, the
legislature finds that there is a need to provide a housing supplement to the
salaries of classroom teachers and other certificated instructional staff in
areas of the state that are most affected by housing affordability concerns,
and intends to provide such a housing supplement for the purposes stated. The
legislature further intends that such a housing supplement in any year is subject
to funding by the legislature, and that the housing supplement shall not be
considered as within the definition of basic education for the purposes of
chapter 28A.150 RCW.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
2. The Washington state
institute for public policy, in consultation with the office of the
superintendent of public instruction, shall develop recommendations for a
methodology for the state to use to provide supplements to the salaries of
certificated instructional staff in common schools, for the purpose of reducing
disparities in the purchasing power of salary compensation among different
areas of the state and increasing the number of qualified teaching staff in
areas with high housing costs.

(1) In developing its
recommendations, the institute shall consider, but not be limited to:

(a) The identification
of the most valid and reliable indices of housing affordability from one
geographic location in the state to another;

(b) The most
appropriate means of relating such indices of housing affordability by
geographic location to employment in the individual school districts of the
state;

(c) Alternative options
for distributing housing supplements among certificated instructional staff
through such an index;

(d) Means for allocating
funds to school districts for the purpose of providing such housing supplements
to certificated instructional staff, in a manner most consistent with the
findings and intent of this act;

(e) Related issues as
found necessary to the development of an efficient and equitable system of
providing housing supplements to the salaries of certificated instructional
staff.

(2) The
Washington state institute for public policy shall make a report of its
recommendations pursuant to subsection (1) of this section to the governor and
the education and fiscal committees of the legislature no later than July 1,
2002.

---
END ---