BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF
WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec.
1. A new section is added
to chapter 47.05 RCW to read as follows:

(1) The department, in
cooperation with local governments, shall direct a baseline allocation of
funding to operations, maintenance, preservation, and safety functions for
state highways, county roads, city streets, transit, ferries, and alternate
modes.

(2) As a condition of
receiving the baseline allocation of funding established in subsection (1) of
this section, all agencies and jurisdictions must demonstrate the use of
maintenance management systems and pavement management systems to the
legislature.

(3) As a condition of
receiving any funding, the department, cities, and counties must demonstrate,
after an initial period of three years, that their preservation investments are
based on lowest life cycle cost principles.

(4)
Available grant programs must not be used to fund preservation projects that
are already funded from baseline fund allocations.

--- END ---