BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF
WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1. RCW 70.190.010 and 1996
c 132 s 2 are each amended to read as follows:

Unless the context
clearly requires otherwise, the definitions in this section apply throughout
this chapter.

(1)
"Administrative costs" means the costs associated with procurement;
payroll processing; personnel functions; management; maintenance and operation
of space and property; data processing and computer services; accounting;
budgeting; auditing; indirect costs; and organizational planning, consultation,
coordination, and training.

(2)
"Assessment" has the same meaning as provided in RCW 43.70.010.

(3) "At-risk"
children are children who engage in or are victims of at-risk behaviors.

(4) "At-risk
behaviors" means violent delinquent acts, teen substance abuse, teen
pregnancy and male parentage, teen suicide attempts, dropping out of school,
child abuse or neglect, and domestic violence.

(5) "Community
public health and safety networks" or "networks" means the
organizations authorized under RCW 70.190.060 (as recodified by this act).

(6) "Comprehensive
plan" means a two-year plan that examines available resources and unmet
needs for a county or multicounty area, barriers that limit the effective use
of resources, and a plan to address these issues that is broadly supported by
local residents.

(7) "Participating
state agencies" means the office of the superintendent of public
instruction, the department of social and health services, the department of
health, the employment security department, the department of community, trade,
and economic development, and such other departments as may be specifically
designated by the governor.

(8) (("Family
policy council" or "council" means the superintendent of public
instruction, the secretary of social and health services, the secretary of
health, the commissioner of the employment security department, and the
director of the department of community, trade, and economic development or
their designees, one legislator from each caucus of the senate and house of
representatives, and one representative of the governor.

(9))) "Fiduciary interest" means (a) the
right to compensation from a health, educational, social service, or justice
system organization that receives public funds, or (b) budgetary or
policy-making authority for an organization listed in (a) of this subsection.
A person who acts solely in an advisory capacity and receives no compensation
from a health, educational, social service, or justice system organization, and
who has no budgetary or policy-making authority is deemed to have no fiduciary
interest in the organization.

(((10))) (9)
"Outcome" or "outcome based" means defined and measurable
outcomes used to evaluate progress in reducing the rate of at-risk children and
youth through reducing risk factors and increasing protective factors.

(((11))) (10)
"Matching funds" means an amount no less than twenty-five percent of
the amount budgeted for a network. The network's matching funds may be in-kind
goods and services. Funding sources allowable for match include appropriate
federal or local levy funds, private charitable funding, and other charitable
giving. Basic education funds shall not be used as a match. State general
funds shall not be used as a match for violence reduction and drug enforcement
account funds created under RCW 69.50.520.

(((12))) (11)
"Policy development" has the same meaning as provided in RCW
43.70.010.

(((13))) (12)
"Protective factors" means those factors determined by the department
of health to be empirically associated with behaviors that contribute to
socially acceptable and healthy nonviolent behaviors. Protective factors
include promulgation, identification, and acceptance of community norms regarding
appropriate behaviors in the area of delinquency, early sexual activity,
alcohol and substance abuse, educational opportunities, employment
opportunities, and absence of crime.

(((14))) (13)
"Risk factors" means those factors determined by the department of
health to be empirically associated with at-risk behaviors that contribute to
violence.

Sec. 2. RCW 70.190.030 and 1994
sp.s. c 7 s 316 are each amended to read as follows:

The ((council)) department
shall annually solicit from community networks proposals to facilitate greater
flexibility, coordination, and responsiveness of services at the community
level. The ((council)) department shall consider such proposals
only if:

(1) A comprehensive
plan has been prepared by the community networks;

(2) The community
network has identified and agreed to contribute matching funds as specified in
RCW 70.190.010 (as recodified by this act);

(3) An interagency
agreement has been prepared by the ((council)) department and the
participating local service and support agencies that governs the use of funds,
specifies the relationship of the project to the principles listed in RCW
74.14A.025, and identifies specific outcomes and indicators; and

(4) The community
network has designed into its comprehensive plan standards for accountability.
Accountability standards include, but are not limited to, the public hearing
process eliciting public comment about the appropriateness of the proposed
comprehensive plan. The community network must submit reports to the ((council))
department outlining the public response regarding the appropriateness
and effectiveness of the comprehensive plan.

Sec. 3. RCW 70.190.040 and 1993
c 336 s 901 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) The legislature
finds that helping children to arrive at school ready to learn is an important
part of improving student learning.

(2) To the extent funds
are appropriated, the ((family policy council)) department shall
award grants to community-based consortiums that submit comprehensive plans
that include strategies to improve readiness to learn.

Sec. 4. RCW 70.190.075 and 1996
c 132 s 4 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) Each network shall
contract with a public entity as its lead fiscal agent. The contract shall
grant the agent authority to perform fiscal, accounting, contract
administration, legal, and other administrative duties, including the provision
of liability insurance. Any contract under this subsection shall be submitted
to the ((council)) department by the network for approval prior
to its execution. The ((council)) department shall review the
contract to determine whether the administrative costs will be held to no more
than ten percent.

(2) The lead agent
shall maintain a system of accounting for network funds consistent with the
budgeting, accounting, and reporting systems and standards adopted or approved
by the state auditor.

(3) The lead agent may
contract with another public or private entity to perform duties other than
fiscal or accounting duties.

Sec. 5. RCW 70.190.090 and 1999
c 309 s 918 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) A network shall,
upon application to the ((council)) department, be eligible to
receive planning grants and technical assistance from the ((council)) department.
However, during the 1999-01 fiscal biennium, a network that has not finalized
its membership shall be eligible to receive such grants and assistance.
Planning grants may be funded through available federal funds for family
preservation services. After receiving the planning grant the network has up
to one year to submit the long-term comprehensive plan.

(2) The ((council))
department shall enter into biennial contracts with networks as part of
the grant process. The contracts shall be consistent with available resources,
and shall be distributed in accordance with the distribution formula developed
pursuant to RCW 43.41.195, subject to the applicable matching fund requirement.

(3) No later than
February 1 of each odd-numbered year following the initial contract between the
((council)) department and a network, the ((council)) department
shall request from the network its plan for the upcoming biennial contract
period.

(4) The ((council))
department shall notify the networks of their allocation of available
resources at least sixty days prior to the start of a new biennial contract
period.

(5) The networks shall,
by contract, distribute funds (a) appropriated for plan implementation by the
legislature, and (b) obtained from nonstate or federal sources. In
distributing funds, the networks shall ensure that administrative costs are
held to a maximum of ten percent. However, during the 1999-01 fiscal biennium,
administrative costs shall be held to a maximum of ten percent or twenty
thousand dollars, whichever is greater, exclusive of costs associated with
procurement, payroll processing, personnel functions, management, maintenance
and operation of space and property, data processing and computer services,
indirect costs, and organizational planning, consultation, coordination, and
training.

(6) A network shall not
provide services or operate programs.

(7) A network shall
file a report with the ((council)) department by May 1 of each
year that includes but is not limited to the following information: Detailed
expenditures, programs under way, progress on contracted services and programs,
and successes and problems in achieving the outcomes required by RCW
70.190.130(1)(h) (as recodified by this act) related to reducing the
rate of state-funded out-of-home placements and the other three at-risk
behaviors covered by the comprehensive plan and approved by the ((council))
department.

Sec. 6. RCW 70.190.100 and 1998
c 245 s 123 are each amended to read as follows:

The ((family policy
council)) department shall:

(1) Establish network
boundaries no later than July 1, 1994. There is a presumption that no county
may be divided between two or more community networks and no network shall have
fewer than forty thousand population. When approving multicounty networks,
considering dividing a county between networks, or creating a network with a
population of less than forty thousand, the ((council)) department
must consider: (a) Common economic, geographic, and social interests; (b)
historical and existing shared governance; and (c) the size and location of
population centers. Individuals and groups within any area shall be given
ample opportunity to propose network boundaries in a manner designed to assure
full consideration of their expressed wishes;

(2) Develop a technical
assistance and training program to assist communities in creating and
developing community networks and comprehensive plans;

(3) Approve the
structure, purpose, goals, plan, and performance measurements of each community
network;

(4) Identify all
prevention and early intervention programs and funds, including all programs
funded under RCW 69.50.520, in addition to the programs set forth in RCW
70.190.110 (as recodified by this act), which could be transferred, in
all or part, to the community networks, and report their findings and
recommendations to the governor and the legislature regarding any appropriate
program transfers by January 1 of each year;

(5) Reward community
networks that show exceptional success as provided in RCW 43.41.195;

(6) Seek every
opportunity to maximize federal and other funding that is consistent with the
plans approved by the ((council)) department for the purpose and
goals of this chapter;

(7) Review the
state-funded out-of-home placement rate before the end of each contract to
determine whether the region has sufficiently reduced the rate. If the ((council))
department determines that there has not been a sufficient reduction in
the rate, it may reduce the immediately succeeding grant to the network;

(8)(a) The ((council))
department shall monitor the implementation of programs contracted by
participating state agencies by reviewing periodic reports on the extent to
which services were delivered to intended populations, the quality of services,
and the extent to which service outcomes were achieved at the conclusion of
service interventions. This monitoring shall include provision for periodic
feedback to community networks;

(b) The legislature
intends that this monitoring be used by the Washington state institute for
public policy, together with public health data on at-risk behaviors and risk
and protective factors, to produce an external evaluation of the effectiveness
of the networks and their programs. For this reason, and to conserve public
funds, the ((council)) department shall not conduct or contract
for the conduct of control group studies, quasi-experimental design studies, or
other analysis efforts to attempt to determine the impact of network programs
on at-risk behaviors or risk and protective factors; and

(9) Review the
implementation of chapter 7, Laws of 1994 sp. sess. The report shall use
measurable performance standards to evaluate the implementation.

Sec. 7. RCW 70.190.110 and 1998
c 245 s 124 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) The ((council))
department, and each network, shall biennially review all state and
federal funded programs serving individuals, families, or communities to
determine whether a network may be better able to integrate and coordinate
these services within the community.

(2) The ((council))
department, and each network, shall specifically review the feasibility
and desirability of decategorizing and granting, all or part of, the following
program funds to the networks:

(a) Consolidated
juvenile services;

(b) Family preservation
and support services;

(c) Readiness to learn;

(d) Community
mobilization;

(e) Violence
prevention;

(f) Community-police
partnership;

(g) Child care;

(h) Early intervention
and educational services, including but not limited to, birth to three, birth
to six, early childhood education and assistance, and headstart;

(i) Crisis residential
care;

(j) Victims'
assistance;

(k) Foster care;

(l) Adoption support;

(m) Continuum of care;
and

(n) Drug and alcohol
abuse prevention and early intervention in schools.

(3) In determining the
desirability of decategorizing these programs the report shall analyze whether:

(a) The program is an
integral part of the comprehensive plan without decategorization;

(b) The program is
already adequately integrated and coordinated with other programs that are, or
will be, funded by the network;

(c) The network could
develop the capacity to provide the program's services;

(d) The program goals
might receive greater community support and reinforcement through the network;

(e) The program
presently ensures that adequate follow-up efforts are utilized, and whether the
network could improve on those efforts through decategorization of the funds;

(f) The
decategorization would benefit the community; and

(g) The
decategorization would assist the network in achieving its goals.

(4) If the ((council))
department or a network determines that a program should not be
decategorized, the ((council)) department or network shall make
recommendations regarding programmatic changes that are necessary to improve
the coordination and integration of services and programs, regardless of the
funding source for those programs.

Sec. 8. RCW 70.190.130 and 1998
c 314 s 13 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) The ((council))
department shall only disburse funds to a network after a comprehensive
plan has been prepared by the network and approved by the ((council)) department.
In approving the plan the ((council)) department shall consider
whether the network:

(a) Promoted input from
the widest practical range of agencies and affected parties, including public
hearings;

(b) Reviewed the
indicators of violence data compiled by the local public health departments and
incorporated a response to those indicators in the plan;

(c) Obtained a
declaration by the largest health department within the network boundary,
indicating whether the plan meets minimum standards for assessment and policy
development relating to social development according to RCW 43.70.555;

(d) Included a specific
mechanism of data collection and transmission based on the rules established
under RCW 43.70.555;

(e) Considered all
relevant causes of violence in its community and did not isolate only one or a
few of the elements to the exclusion of others and demonstrated evidence of
building community capacity through effective neighborhood and community
development;

(f) Considered youth
employment and job training programs outlined in this chapter as a strategy to
reduce the rate of at-risk children and youth;

(g) Integrated local
programs that met the network's priorities and were deemed successful by the
network;

(h) Committed to make
measurable reductions in the rate of at-risk children and youth by reducing the
rate of state-funded out-of-home placements and make reductions in at least
three of the following rates of youth: Violent criminal acts, substance abuse,
pregnancy and male parentage, suicide attempts, dropping out of school, child
abuse or neglect, and domestic violence; and

(i) Held a public
hearing on its proposed comprehensive plan and submitted to the ((council))
department all of the written comments received at the hearing and a
copy of the minutes taken at the hearing.

(2) The ((council))
department may establish a maximum amount to be expended by a network
for purposes of planning and administrative duties, that shall not, in total,
exceed ten percent of funds available to a network. The ((council)) department
shall make recommendations to the legislature regarding the specific maximum
amounts that can be spent by a network or group of networks on planning and
administrative duties. The recommendation may provide differing percentages,
considering the size of the budgets of each network and giving consideration to
whether there should be a higher percentage for administrative and planning
purposes in budgets for smaller networks and a smaller percentage of the
budgets for administration and planning purposes in larger networks.

(3) The ((council))
department may determine that a network is not in compliance with this
chapter if it fails to comply with statutory requirements. Upon a
determination of noncompliance, the ((council)) department may
suspend or revoke a network's status or contract and specify a process and
deadline for the network's compliance.

Sec. 9. RCW 70.190.150 and 1994
sp.s. c 7 s 312 are each amended to read as follows:

If there exist any
federal restrictions against the transfer of funds, for the programs enumerated
in RCW 70.190.110 (as recodified by this act), to the community
networks, the ((council)) department shall assist the governor in
immediately applying to the federal government for waivers of the federal
restrictions. The ((council)) department shall also assist the
governor in coordinating efforts to make any changes in federal law necessary
to meet the purpose and intent of chapter 7, Laws of 1994 sp. sess.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
10. A new section is added
to chapter 70.190 RCW to read as follows:

The social services
policy and audit council is established. The membership of the council shall
be:

(1) The superintendent
of public instruction;

(2) The secretary of
social and health services;

(3) The secretary of
health;

(4) The commissioner of
the employment security department;

(5) The director of the
department of community, trade, and economic development or his or her
designee;

(6) Two legislators,
one from each caucus of the senate and house of representatives; and

(7) One representative
of the governor.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
11. A new section is added
to chapter 70.190 RCW to read as follows:

The duties of the
social services policy and audit council are:

(1) Strategic planning
for state social services policy;

(2) Establishing
performance standards for the department of social and health services;

(3) Conducting
performance audits of social services delivery systems; and

(4) Recommending to the
legislature changes in social services delivery systems.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
12. A new section is added
to chapter 70.190 RCW to read as follows:

(1) In conducting
performance audits and other reviews, the council shall work closely with the
chairs and staff of standing committees of the senate and house of
representatives, and may work in consultation with the joint legislative audit
and review committee, state auditor, and the director of financial management.

(2) The council may
contract with and consult with public and private independent professional and
technical experts as necessary in conducting the performance audits. The
council should also involve front-line employees and internal auditors in the
performance audit process to the highest possible degree.

(3) The council shall
work with the legislative evaluation and accountability program committee and
the office of financial management to develop information system capabilities
necessary for the performance audit requirements of this chapter.

(4) The council shall
work with the legislative office of performance review and the office of
financial management to facilitate the implementation of effective performance
measures throughout state government. In agencies and programs where effective
systems for performance measurement exist, the measurements incorporated into
those systems should be a basis for performance audits conducted under this
chapter.

(5) Performance audits
may include the following:

(a) An examination of
the costs and benefits of agency programs, functions, and activities;

(b) Identification of
viable alternatives for reducing costs or improving service delivery;

(c) Identification of
gaps and overlaps in service delivery, along with corrective action; and

(d) Comparison with
other states whose agencies perform similar functions, as well as their
relative funding levels and performance.

(6) As part of a
performance audit, the council may review the costs of programs recently
implemented by the legislature to compare actual agency costs with the
appropriations provided and the cost estimates that were included in the fiscal
note for the program at the time the program was enacted.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
13. A new section is added
to chapter 70.190 RCW to read as follows:

The council has the
following powers:

(1) To examine and
report whether appropriations are being expended for the purposes and within
the statutory restrictions provided by the legislature;

(2) To examine and
report on the organization and procedures necessary or desirable to promote
economy, efficiency, and effectiveness in state government, its officers,
boards, committees, commissions, institutions, and other state agencies;

(3) To make
recommendations and reports to the legislature;

(4) To study and
examine the economy, efficiency, and effectiveness of state government and its
state agencies as it may find advisable, and to hear complaints, hold hearings,
gather information, and make findings of fact;

(5) To receive a copy
of each report of examination or audit issued by the state auditor and to make
recommendations as it deems appropriate as a separate addendum to the report or
audit;

(6) To develop internal
tracking procedures that will allow the legislature to measure the
effectiveness of performance audits conducted by the council including, where
appropriate, measurements of cost savings and increases in efficiency and
effectiveness in how state agencies deliver their services;

(7) To receive messages
and reports in person or in writing from the governor or any other state
officials and to study generally any and all business relating to economy,
efficiency, and effectiveness in state government and state agencies.

Sec. 14. RCW 13.40.510 and 1997 c
338 s 61 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) In order to receive
funds under RCW 13.40.500 through 13.40.540, local governments may, through
their respective agencies that administer funding for consolidated juvenile
services, submit proposals that establish community juvenile accountability
programs within their communities. These proposals must be submitted to the
juvenile rehabilitation administration of the department of social and health
services for certification.

(2) The proposals must:

(a) Demonstrate that
the proposals were developed with the input of the community public health and
safety networks established under RCW 70.190.060 (as recodified by this act),
and the local law and justice councils established under RCW 72.09.300;

(b) Describe how local
community groups or members are involved in the implementation of the programs
funded under RCW 13.40.500 through 13.40.540;

(c) Include a
description of how the grant funds will contribute to the expected outcomes of
the program and the reduction of youth violence and juvenile crime in their community.
Data approaches are not required to be replicated if the networks have
information that addresses risks in the community for juvenile offenders.

(3) A local government
receiving a grant under this section shall agree that any funds received must
be used efficiently to encourage the use of community-based programs that
reduce the reliance on secure confinement as the sole means of holding juvenile
offenders accountable for their crimes. The local government shall also agree
to account for the expenditure of all funds received under the grant and to
submit to audits for compliance with the grant criteria developed under RCW
13.40.520.

(4) The juvenile
rehabilitation administration, in consultation with the Washington association
of juvenile court administrators, the state law and justice advisory council,
and the ((family policy council)) department of community, trade, and
economic development, shall establish guidelines for programs that may be
funded under RCW 13.40.500 through 13.40.540. The guidelines must:

(a) Target diverted and
adjudicated juvenile offenders;

(b) Include assessment
methods to determine services, programs, and intervention strategies most
likely to change behaviors and norms of juvenile offenders;

(c) Provide maximum
structured supervision in the community. Programs should use natural
surveillance and community guardians such as employers, relatives, teachers,
clergy, and community mentors to the greatest extent possible;

(d) Promote good work
ethic values and educational skills and competencies necessary for the juvenile
offender to function effectively and positively in the community;

(e) Maximize the
efficient delivery of treatment services aimed at reducing risk factors
associated with the commission of juvenile offenses;

(f) Maximize the
reintegration of the juvenile offender into the community upon release from
confinement;

(g) Maximize the
juvenile offender's opportunities to make full restitution to the victims and
amends to the community;

(h) Support and encourage
increased court discretion in imposing community-based intervention strategies;

(i) Be compatible with
research that shows which prevention and early intervention strategies work
with juvenile offenders;

(j) Be outcome-based in
that it describes what outcomes will be achieved or what outcomes have already
been achieved;

(k) Include an
evaluation component; and

(l) Recognize the
diversity of local needs.

(5) The state law and
justice advisory council, with the assistance of the ((family policy council))
department of community, trade, and economic development and the
governor's juvenile justice advisory committee, may provide support and
technical assistance to local governments for training and education regarding
community-based prevention and intervention strategies.

Sec. 15. RCW 43.70.555 and 1998 c
245 s 77 are each amended to read as follows:

The department, in
consultation with the ((family policy council created in chapter 70.190 RCW))
department of community, trade, and economic development, shall
establish, by rule, standards for local health departments and networks to use
in assessment, performance measurement, policy development, and assurance
regarding social development to prevent health problems caused by risk factors
empirically linked to: Violent criminal acts by juveniles, teen substance
abuse, teen pregnancy and male parentage, teen suicide attempts, dropping out
of school, child abuse or neglect, and domestic violence. The standards shall
be based on the standards set forth in the public health services improvement
plan as required by RCW 43.70.550.

Sec. 16. RCW 69.50.520 and 2000
2nd sp.s. c 1 s 917 are each amended to read as follows:

The violence reduction
and drug enforcement account is created in the state treasury. All designated
receipts from RCW 9.41.110(8), 66.24.210(4), 66.24.290(2), 69.50.505(h)(1),
82.08.150(5), 82.24.020(2), 82.64.020, and section 420, chapter 271, Laws of
1989 shall be deposited into the account. Expenditures from the account may be
used only for funding services and programs under chapter 271, Laws of 1989 and
chapter 7, Laws of 1994 sp. sess., including state incarceration costs. Funds
from the account may also be appropriated to reimburse local governments for
costs associated with implementing criminal justice legislation including
chapter 338, Laws of 1997. During the 1999-2001 biennium, funds from the account
may also be used for costs associated with providing grants to local
governments in accordance with chapter 338, Laws of 1997, the design, sitework,
and construction of the special commitment center, the replacement of the
department of corrections' offender-based tracking system, and for
multijurisdictional narcotics task forces. After July 1, 2001, at least seven
and one-half percent of expenditures from the account shall be used for
providing grants to community networks under chapter ((70.190)) 43.63A
RCW by the ((family policy council)) department of community, trade,
and economic development.

Sec. 17. RCW 74.14A.060 and 2000
c 219 s 2 are each amended to read as follows:

The secretary of the
department of social and health services shall charge appropriated funds to
support blended funding projects for youth subject to any current or future
waiver the department receives to the requirements of IV-E funding. To be
eligible for blended funding a child must be eligible for services designed to
address a behavioral, mental, emotional, or substance abuse issue from the
department of social and health services and require services from more than
one categorical service delivery system. Before any blended funding project is
established by the secretary, any entity or person proposing the project shall
seek input from the public health and safety network or networks established in
the catchment area of the project. The network or networks shall submit
recommendations on the blended funding project to the ((family policy
council)) department of community, trade, and economic development.
The ((family policy council)) department of community, trade, and
economic development shall advise the secretary whether to approve the proposed
blended funding project. The network shall review the proposed blended funding
project pursuant to its authority to examine the decategorization of program
funds under RCW 70.190.110 (as recodified by this act), within the
current appropriation level. The department shall document the number of
children who participate in blended funding projects, the total blended funding
amounts per child, the amount charged to each appropriation by program, and
services provided to each child through each blended funding project and report
this information to the appropriate committees of the legislature by December
1st of each year, beginning in December 1, 2000.

Sec. 18. RCW 74.14C.050 and 1995
c 311 s 9 are each amended to read as follows:

By December 1, 1995,
the department, with the assistance of the ((family policy council)) department
of community, trade, and economic development, two urban and two rural
public health and safety networks to be chosen by the ((family policy council))
department of community, trade, and economic development, and two
private, nonprofit agencies with expertise and experience in preservation
services shall submit to the legislature an implementation and evaluation plan
that identifies:

(1) A valid and
reliable process that can be used by caseworkers for accurately identifying
clients who are eligible for intensive family preservation services and family
preservation services. The plan shall recognize the due process rights of
families that receive preservation services and recognize that family
preservation services are not intended to be investigative for purposes of
chapter 13.34 RCW;

(2) Necessary data by
which program success will be measured, projections of service needs, budget
requests, and long-range planning;

(3) Regional and
statewide projections of service needs;

(4) A cost estimate for
statewide implementation and expansion of preservation services on a phased-in
basis beginning no later than July 1, 1996;

(5) A plan and time
frame for phased-in implementation of preservation services on a statewide
basis to be accomplished as soon as possible but no later than July 1, 1997;

(6) Data regarding the
number of children in foster care, group care, institutional placements, and
other out-of-home placements due to medical needs, mental health needs,
developmental disabilities, and juvenile offenses, and an assessment of the
feasibility of providing preservation services to include all of these
children;

(7) Standards and
outcome measures for the department when the department provides preservation
services directly; and

(8) A process to assess
outcome measures identified in RCW 74.14C.030 for contractors providing
preservation services.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
19. The following sections
are each recodified as sections in chapter 43.63A RCW: RCW 70.190.010 (as
amended by this act), 70.190.030 (as amended by this act), 70.190.040 (as
amended by this act), 70.190.050, 70.190.060, 70.190.065, 70.190.075 (as
amended by this act), 70.190.080, 70.190.085, 70.190.090 (as amended by this
act), 70.190.100 (as amended by this act), 70.190.110 (as amended by this act),
70.190.120, 170.190.130 (as amended by this act), 70.190.150 (as amended by
this act), 70.190.160, 70.190.170, 70.190.180, 70.190.190, and 70.190.910.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 20. RCW 70.190.920 (Effective date--1992 c
198) and 1992 c 198 s 21 are each repealed.

---
END ---