BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF
WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec.
1. (1) The legislature
recognizes that Point Roberts is uniquely situated in this state. Unless
approached by the water, it is necessary to travel through part of Canada to
enter Point Roberts. Because of its location, residents of Point Roberts may
be alongside Canadian boaters who are fishing in Canadian waters that are open
for fishing, but the residents of Point Roberts are unable to land fish caught
from these same waters at the same time. The legislature therefore finds that
a limited pilot program should be established to determine if it is possible to
extend sport fishing opportunities for residents of Point Roberts without
exceeding conservation limits established for the fish.

(2) The department of
fish and wildlife shall establish a one-year pilot program to allow food fish
caught for personal use in Canadian waters during closed fishing periods in
Washington waters to be landed in Point Roberts. The department shall
establish the number of fish that may be landed under this pilot program and
reasonable enforcement mechanisms to enforce the landing requirements. The
department shall adopt reasonable rules for the establishment of this pilot
program.

(3) Nothing in this
section eliminates the need for a valid Canadian fishing license if one is
required.

(4) The department
shall compare the landing levels under the pilot program with landing levels
prior to establishment of the pilot program. The department shall report its
findings, including any difficulties in enforcing the program, to the
appropriate legislative committees by December 1, 2001.

(5) This section
expires January 1, 2002.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 2. The sum of forty thousand
dollars, or as much thereof as may be necessary, is appropriated for the fiscal
year ending June 30, 2002, from the general fund to the department of fish and
wildlife for the purposes of this act.

---
END ---