BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF
WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec.
1. A new section is added
to chapter 28A.525 RCW to read as follows:

(1) The school
construction safety net grant program is established. The purpose of the
program is to help build or modernize schools in school districts that have
persistently tried but failed to obtain local funds for that purpose.

(2) The program shall
be administered by the state board of education. Through the program, the
state board shall provide to an eligible school district a grant to cover the
entire cost of a new or modernized school. The costs may be adjusted to
reflect standard costs for all aspects of the facility and grounds and may
include consideration of local circumstances. The costs may not include any
required local match for the project.

(3) An eligible school
district is a district that:

(a) Under RCW
84.52.056, has tried but failed at least twice a year for two or more
consecutive years to obtain voter approval for the issuance of general
obligation bonds for capital purposes; and

(b) Has applied under
the program for a grant to build a school or modernize or replace an existing
school building.

(4) By December 1st of
each year, the state board of education shall report to the governor and the
legislature a list of projects eligible for funding under the program and the
amount needed to fully fund the costs for each eligible project. The state
board may submit a revised list by February 15th if additional projects are
identified by that date. The state board shall provide the list in priority
order, using an index that considers the amount of time that each eligible
district has failed to obtain voter approval for the issuance of the general
obligation bonds needed for school construction, the most current number of
unhoused students that would be served through the project, and the condition
of the school facility.

(5) The school
construction safety net account is created in the custody of the state
treasurer. All receipts from appropriations for the construction and
modernization of schools under this section must be deposited into the
account. Expenditures from the account may be used only for school
construction in accordance with this section. Only the state board of
education may authorize expenditures from the account. The account is subject
to allotment procedures under chapter 43.88 RCW, but an appropriation is not
required for expenditures.

(6) The state board of
education shall, to the greatest extent possible, simplify any administrative
processes associated with the grant program.

Sec. 2. RCW 28A.525.162 and 1995
c 77 s 24 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) Funds appropriated
to the state board of education from the common school construction fund shall
be allotted by the state board of education in accordance with student
enrollment and the provisions of RCW 28A.525.200.

(2) No allotment shall
be made to a school district until such district has provided matching funds
equal to or greater than the difference between the total approved project cost
and the amount of state assistance to the district for financing the project
computed pursuant to RCW 28A.525.166, with the following exceptions:

(a) The state board may
waive the matching requirement for districts which have provided funds for
school building construction purposes through the authorization of bonds or
through the authorization of excess tax levies or both in an amount equivalent
to two and one-half percent of the value of its taxable property, as defined in
RCW 39.36.015.

(b) No such matching
funds shall be required as a condition to the allotment of funds for the
purpose of making major or minor structural changes to existing school
facilities in order to bring such facilities into compliance with the barrier
free access requirements of section 504 of the federal rehabilitation act of
1973 (29 U.S.C. Sec. 706) and rules implementing the act.

(3) For the purpose of
computing the state matching percentage under RCW 28A.525.166 when a school
district is granted authority to enter into contracts, adjusted valuation per
pupil shall be calculated using headcount student enrollments from the most
recent October enrollment reports submitted by districts to the superintendent
of public instruction, adjusted as follows:

(a) In the case of
projects for which local bonds were approved after May 11, 1989:

(i) For districts which
have been designated as serving high school districts under RCW 28A.540.110,
students residing in the nonhigh district so designating shall be excluded from
the enrollment count if the student is enrolled in any grade level not offered
by the nonhigh district;

(ii) The enrollment of
nonhigh school districts shall be increased by the number of students residing
within the district who are enrolled in a serving high school district so
designated by the nonhigh school district under RCW 28A.540.110, including only
students who are enrolled in grade levels not offered by the nonhigh school
district; and

(iii) The number of
preschool students with disabilities included in the enrollment count shall be
multiplied by one-half;

(b) In the case of
construction or modernization of high school facilities in districts serving
students from nonhigh school districts, the adjusted valuation per pupil shall
be computed using the combined adjusted valuations and enrollments of each
district, each weighted by the percentage of the district's resident high
school students served by the high school district; and

(c) The number of
kindergarten students included in the enrollment count shall be multiplied by
one-half.

(4) The state board of
education shall prescribe and make effective such rules as are necessary to
equate insofar as possible the efforts made by school districts to provide
capital funds by the means aforesaid.

(5) For the purposes of
this section, "preschool students with disabilities" means
developmentally disabled children of preschool age who are entitled to services
under RCW 28A.155.010 through 28A.155.100 and are not included in the
kindergarten enrollment count of the district.

(6) Projects funded
under section 1 of this act are exempt from the requirements in this section.

Sec. 3. RCW 28A.525.166 and 1997
c 369 s 9 are each amended to read as follows:

Allocations to school
districts of state funds provided by RCW 28A.525.160 through 28A.525.182 shall
be made by the state board of education and the amount of state assistance to a
school district in financing a school plant project shall be determined in the
following manner:

(1) The boards of
directors of the districts shall determine the total cost of the proposed
project, which cost may include the cost of acquiring and preparing the site,
the cost of constructing the building or of acquiring a building and preparing
the same for school use, the cost of necessary equipment, taxes chargeable to
the project, necessary architects' fees, and a reasonable amount for
contingencies and for other necessary incidental expenses: PROVIDED, That the
total cost of the project shall be subject to review and approval by the state
board of education.

(2) The state matching
percentage for a school district shall be computed by the following formula:

The ratio of the school
district's adjusted valuation per pupil divided by the ratio of the total state
adjusted valuation per pupil shall be subtracted from three, and then the
result of the foregoing shall be divided by three plus (the ratio of the school
district's adjusted valuation per pupil divided by the ratio of the total state
adjusted valuation per pupil).

District
adjusted Total state ad-

3‑ valuation
per ) justed
valuation

Computed pupil per
pupil State

State = BBBBBBBBBBBBBBBBBBBBBBBBBBBBBBBBBBBBB = B% Assist‑

Ratio District
adjusted Total state ad- ance

3+ valuation
per ) justed
valuation

pupil per
pupil

PROVIDED, That in the event
the percentage of state assistance to any school district based on the above
formula is less than twenty percent and such school district is otherwise
eligible for state assistance under RCW 28A.525.160 through 28A.525.182, the state
board of education may establish for such district a percentage of state
assistance not in excess of twenty percent of the approved cost of the project,
if the state board finds that such additional assistance is necessary to
provide minimum facilities for housing the pupils of the district.

(3) In addition to the
computed percent of state assistance developed in subsection (2) ((above))
of this section, a school district shall be entitled to additional
percentage points determined by the average percentage of growth for the past
three years. One percent shall be added to the computed percent of state
assistance for each percent of growth, with a maximum of twenty percent.

(4) The
approved cost of the project determined in the manner herein prescribed times
the percentage of state assistance derived as provided for herein shall be the
amount of state assistance to the district for the financing of the project:
PROVIDED, That need therefor has been established to the satisfaction of the
state board of education: PROVIDED, FURTHER, That additional state assistance
may be allowed if it is found by the state board of education that such
assistance is necessary in order to meet (a) a school housing emergency
resulting from the destruction of a school building by fire, the condemnation
of a school building by properly constituted authorities, a sudden excessive
and clearly foreseeable future increase in school population, or other
conditions similarly emergent in nature; or (b) a special school housing burden
resulting from industrial projects of statewide significance or imposed by
virtue of the admission of nonresident students into educational programs
established, maintained and operated in conformity with the requirements of
law; or (c) a deficiency in the capital funds of the district resulting from
financing, subsequent to April 1, 1969, and without benefit of the state
assistance provided by prior state assistance programs, the construction of a
needed school building project or projects approved in conformity with the
requirements of such programs, after having first applied for and been denied
state assistance because of the inadequacy of state funds available for the
purpose((,)); or (d) a condition created by the fact that an
excessive number of students live in state owned housing((,)); or
(e) a need for the construction of a school building to provide for improved
school district organization or racial balance((,)); or (f)
conditions similar to those defined under (a), (b), (c), (d), and (e) ((hereinabove))
of this subsection, creating a like emergency.

(5)
Projects funded under section 1 of this act are exempt from the requirements in
this section.

---
END ---