BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF
WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1. RCW 13.40.265 and 1997 c
338 s 37 are each amended to read as follows:

(1)(a) If a juvenile
thirteen years of age or older is found by juvenile court to have committed an
offense while armed with a firearm or an offense that is a violation of RCW
9.41.040(1)(b)(iii), RCW 9.61.160 with respect to a school building, or
chapter 66.44, 69.41, 69.50, or 69.52 RCW, the court shall notify the
department of licensing within twenty-four hours after entry of the judgment.

(b) Except as otherwise
provided in (c) of this subsection, upon petition of a juvenile who has been
found by the court to have committed an offense that is a violation of RCW
9.61.160 or chapter 66.44, 69.41, 69.50, or 69.52 RCW, the court may at any
time the court deems appropriate notify the department of licensing that the
juvenile's driving privileges should be reinstated.

(c) If the offense is
the juvenile's first violation of RCW 9.61.160 or chapter 66.44, 69.41,
69.50, or 69.52 RCW, the juvenile may not petition the court for reinstatement
of the juvenile's privilege to drive revoked pursuant to RCW 46.20.265 until
ninety days after the date the juvenile turns sixteen or ninety days after the
judgment was entered, whichever is later. If the offense is the juvenile's
second or subsequent violation of RCW 9.61.160 or chapter 66.44, 69.41,
69.50, or 69.52 RCW, the juvenile may not petition the court for reinstatement
of the juvenile's privilege to drive revoked pursuant to RCW 46.20.265 until
the date the juvenile turns seventeen or one year after the date judgment was
entered, whichever is later.

(2)(a) If a juvenile
enters into a diversion agreement with a diversion unit pursuant to RCW
13.40.080 concerning an offense that is a violation of chapter 66.44, 69.41,
69.50, or 69.52 RCW, the diversion unit shall notify the department of
licensing within twenty-four hours after the diversion agreement is signed.

(b) If a
diversion unit has notified the department pursuant to (a) of this subsection,
the diversion unit shall notify the department of licensing when the juvenile
has completed the agreement.

--- END ---