BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF
WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec.
1. The legislature finds
that the extensive use of hatchery fish in this state has left little genetic
difference between native fish stocks and the hatchery fish. The legislature
also finds that because these fish frequently stray from one watershed to another,
the assertion that there are separate and distinct fish stocks within the state
watersheds may not be strongly supported by science. The legislature further
finds that it is necessary to allow returning salmon to spawn if salmon
populations are ever to return to self-sustaining levels. The purpose of this
act is to allow all returning salmon to spawn, without prejudice to their
origin, and to provide technical assistance to stakeholders in supplementation
efforts to rebuild salmon stocks to self-sustaining levels.

Sec. 2. RCW 77.95.210 and 2000 c
107 s 11 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) The
department may supply, at a reasonable charge, surplus salmon eggs to a person
for use in the cultivation of salmon. The department shall not intentionally
create a surplus of salmon to provide eggs for sale. The department shall only
sell salmon eggs from stocks that are not suitable for salmon population
rehabilitation or enhancement in state waters in Washington. All sales or
transfers shall be consistent with the department's egg transfer and
aquaculture disease control regulations as now existing or hereafter amended.
Prior to department determination that eggs of a salmon stock are surplus and
available for sale, the department shall assess the productivity of each
watershed that is suitable for receiving eggs.

(2) Unless
prohibited by a federal agency, the department must make viable eggs available
for propagation in watersheds where supplementation of fish runs is needed to
assist in rebuilding sustainable populations of fish. The department must give
priority to watersheds that have made habitat restoration improvements in
distributing the eggs.

Sec. 3. RCW 77.95.270 and 1989 c
336 s 6 are each amended to read as follows:

The
department may make available to private contractors salmon eggs in excess of
department hatchery needs for the purpose of contract rearing to release the
smolts into public waters. Providing salmon eggs to volunteer groups,
federally approved Indian tribes, and governmental hatcheries is the
department's highest priority in providing eggs for propagation. The
priority of providing eggs to contract rearing shall be higher than providing
eggs to aquaculture purposes which are not destined for release into Washington
public waters.

Sec. 4. RCW 77.100.050 and 1987
c 505 s 73 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) The department
shall:

(a) Encourage and
support the establishment of cooperative agreements for the development and
operation of cooperative food fish, shellfish, game fish, game bird, game
animal, and nongame wildlife projects, and projects which provide an
opportunity for volunteer groups to become involved in resource and
habitat-oriented activities. All cooperative projects shall be fairly
considered in the approval of cooperative agreements;

(b) Identify regions
and species or activities that would be particularly suitable for cooperative
projects providing benefits compatible with department goals;

(c) Determine the
availability of rearing space at operating facilities or of net pens, egg
boxes, portable rearing containers, incubators, and any other rearing
facilities for use in cooperative projects, and allocate them to volunteer
groups as fairly as possible;

(d) Make viable eggs
available for replenishing fish runs, and salmon carcasses for nutrient
enhancement of streams;

(e) Exempt
volunteer groups from payment of fees to the department for activities related
to the project;

(((e))) (f)
Publicize the cooperative program;

(((f))) (g)
Not substitute a new cooperative project for any part of the department's
program unless mutually agreeable to the department and volunteer group;

(((g))) (h)
Not approve agreements that are incompatible with legally existing land, water,
or property rights.

(2) The department may,
when requested, provide to volunteer groups its available professional
expertise and assist the volunteer group to evaluate its project. The
department must conduct annual workshops in each administrative region of the
department that has fish stocks listed under the federal endangered species
act, 16 U.S.C. Sec. 1531 et seq., in order to assist volunteer groups with egg
rearing, share information on successful salmon recovery projects accomplished
by volunteers within the state, and provide basic training on monitoring
efforts that can be accomplished by volunteers.

Sec. 5. RCW 77.100.060 and 2000
c 107 s 112 are each amended to read as follows:

The commission shall
establish by rule:

(1) The procedure for
entering a cooperative agreement and the application forms for a permit to
release fish or wildlife required by RCW 77.12.457. The procedure shall
indicate the information required from the volunteer group as well as the
process of review by the department. The process of review shall include the
means to coordinate with other agencies and Indian tribes when appropriate and
to coordinate the review of any necessary hydraulic permit approval
applications.

(2) The procedure for
providing within forty-five days of receipt of a proposal a written response to
the volunteer group indicating the date by which an acceptance or rejection of
the proposal can be expected, the reason why the date was selected, and a
written summary of the process of review. The response should also include any
suggested modifications to the proposal which would increase its likelihood of
approval and the date by which such modified proposal could be expected to be
accepted. If the proposal is rejected, the department must provide in writing
the reasons for rejection. The volunteer group may request the director or the
director's designee to review information provided in the response.

(3) The priority of the
uses to which eggs, seed, juveniles, or brood stock are put. The rules must
prohibit the destruction of hatchery origin salmon for the purposes of
destroying viable eggs that could be used for salmon propagation in watersheds
in which volunteer groups have expressed an interest in entering into a
cooperative agreement for rearing eggs to assist with salmon recovery. Use
by cooperative projects shall be second in priority only to the needs of
programs of the department or of other public agencies within the territorial
boundaries of the state. Sales of eggs, seed, juveniles, or brood stock have a
lower priority than use for cooperative projects.

(4) The procedure for
the director to notify a volunteer group that the agreement for the project is
being revoked for cause and the procedure for revocation. Revocation shall be
documented in writing to the volunteer group. Cause for revocation may
include: (a) The unavailability of adequate biological or financial resources;
(b) the development of unacceptable biological or resource management
conflicts; or (c) a violation of agreement provisions. Notice of cause to
revoke for a violation of agreement provisions may specify a reasonable period
of time within which the volunteer group must comply with any violated
provisions of the agreement.

(5) An
appropriate method of distributing among volunteer groups fish, bird, or animal
food or other supplies available for the program.

---
END ---