BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF
WASHINGTON:

_6 NEW SECTION. Sec. 1. The legislature finds
that programs to

_7 allow buyers to remit sales and use tax, rather than
traditional

_8 collection and remittance by the seller of sales and use
tax, can

_9 assist in tax compliance, ease administrative burdens,
and reduce

10 impacts on buyers and sellers. It is the intent of the
legislature

11 to grant the department of revenue the authority to
permit certain

12 buyers direct payment authority of tax in those
instances where it

13 can be shown, to the satisfaction of the department,
that direct

14 payment does not burden sellers and does not complicate

15 administration for the department. Buyers authorized
for direct

16 payment will remit tax directly to the department, and
will pay

17 use tax on tangible personal property and sales tax on
retail

18 labor and/or services.

p. 1 HB
1706

_1 This act does not affect the requirements to use a
resale

_2 certificate nor does it affect the business and
occupation tax

_3 treatment of the seller.

_4 NEW SECTION. Sec. 2. A new section is
added to chapter 82.32

_5 RCW to read as follows:

_6 (1) The director may grant a direct pay permit to a
taxpayer

_7 who demonstrates, to the satisfaction of the director,
that the

_8 taxpayer meets the requirements of this section. The
direct pay

_9 permit allows the taxpayer to accrue and remit directly
to the

10 department use tax on the acquisition of tangible personal

11 property or sales tax on the sale of or charges made for
labor

12 and/or services, in accordance with all of the
applicable

13 provisions of this title. Any taxpayer that uses a
direct pay

14 permit shall remit state and local sales or use tax directly
to

15 the department. The agreement by the purchaser to remit
tax

16 directly to the department, rather than pay sales or use
tax to

17 the seller, relieves the seller of the obligation to
collect sales

18 or use tax and requires the buyer to pay use tax on the
tangible

19 personal property and sales tax on the sale of or
charges made for

20 labor and/or services.

21 (2)(a) A taxpayer may apply for a permit under this
section if

22 the taxpayer (i) is subject to mandatory use of
electronic funds

23 transfer under RCW 82.32.080; or (ii) makes purchases
subject to

24 the taxes imposed under chapter 82.08 or 82.12 RCW in
excess of

25 ten million dollars per calendar year.

26 (b) Application for a permit must be made in writing
to the

27 director in a form and manner prescribed by the
department. A

28 taxpayer who transacts business in two or more locations
may

29 submit one application to cover the multiple locations.

30 (c) The director shall review a direct pay permit
application

31 in a timely manner and shall notify the applicant, in
writing, of

32 the approval or denial of the application. The
department shall

33 approve or deny an application based on the applicant=s
ability to

34 comply with local government use tax coding capabilities
and

35 responsibilities; requirements for vendor notification;

36 recordkeeping obligations; electronic data capabilities;
and tax

37 reporting procedures. Additionally, an application may
be denied if

HB 1706 p. 2

_1 the director determines that denial would be in the best
interest

_2 of collecting taxes due under this title. The
department shall

_3 provide a direct pay permit to an approved applicant
with the

_4 notice of approval. The direct pay permit shall clearly
state that

_5 the holder is solely responsible for the accrual and
payment of

_6 the tax imposed under chapters 82.08 and 82.12 RCW and
that the

_7 seller is relieved of liability to collect tax imposed
under

_8 chapters 82.08 and 82.12 RCW on all sales to the direct
pay permit

_9 holder. The taxpayer may petition the director for
reconsideration

10 of a denial.

11 (d) A taxpayer who uses a direct pay permit must
continue to

12 maintain records that are necessary to a determination
of the tax

13 liability in accordance with this title. A direct pay
permit is not

14 transferable and the use of a direct pay permit may not
be

15 assigned to a third party.

16 (3) Taxes for which the direct pay permit is used
are due and

17 payable on the tax return for the reporting period in
which the

18 taxpayer (a) receives the tangible personal property
purchased or

19 in which the labor and/or services are performed or (b)
receives

20 an invoice for such property or such labor and/or
services,

21 whichever period is earlier.

22 (4) The holder of a direct pay permit shall furnish
a copy of

23 the direct pay permit to each vendor with whom the
taxpayer has

24 opted to use a direct pay permit. Sellers who make
sales upon which

25 the sales or use tax is not collected by reason of the
provisions

26 of this section, in addition to existing requirements
under this

27 title, shall maintain a copy of the direct pay permit
and any such

28 records or information as the department may specify.

29 (5) A direct pay permit is subject to revocation by
the

30 director at any time the department determines that the
taxpayer

31 has violated any provision of this section or that
revocation

32 would be in the best interests of collecting the taxes
due under

33 this title. The notice of revocation must be in writing
and is

34 effective either as of the end of the taxpayer's next
normal

35 reporting period or a date deemed appropriate by the
director and

36 identified in the revocation notice. The taxpayer may
petition the

37 director for reconsideration of a revocation and
reinstatement of

38 the permit.

p. 3 HB
1706

_1 (6) Any taxpayer who chooses to no longer use a
direct pay

_2 permit or whose permit is revoked by the department,
shall return

_3 the permit to the department and immediately make a good
faith

_4 effort to notify all vendors to whom the permit was
given,

_5 advising them that the permit is no longer valid.

_6 (7) Except as provided in this subsection, the
direct pay

_7 permit may be used for any purchase of tangible personal
property

_8 and any retail sale under RCW 82.04.050. The direct pay
permit may

_9 not be used for:

10 (a) Purchases of meals or beverages;

11 (b) Purchases of motor vehicles, trailers, boats,
airplanes,

12 and other property subject to requirements for title
transactions

13 by the department of licensing;

14 (c) Purchases for which a resale certificate may be
used;

15 (d) Purchases that meet the definitions of RCW
82.04.050 (2)

16 (e) and (f), (3) (a) through (d), (f), and (g), and (5);
or

17 (e) Other activities subject to tax under chapter
82.08 or

18 82.12 RCW that the department by rule designates,
consistent with

19 the purposes of this section, as activities for which a
direct pay

20 permit is not appropriate and may not be used.

21 Sec. 3. RCW
82.12.010 and 1994 c 93 s 1 are each amended to read

22 as follows:

23 For the purposes of this chapter:

24 (1)(a) "Value of the article used" shall
mean the

25 consideration, whether money, credit, rights, or other
property

26 except trade-in property of like kind, expressed in
terms of

27 money, paid or given or contracted to be paid or given
by the

28 purchaser to the seller for the article of tangible
personal

29 property, the use of which is taxable under this
chapter. The term

30 includes, in addition to the consideration paid or given
or

31 contracted to be paid or given, the amount of any tariff
or duty

32 paid with respect to the importation of the article
used. In case

33 the article used is acquired by lease or by gift or is
extracted,

34 produced, or manufactured by the person using the same
or is sold

35 under conditions wherein the purchase price does not
represent the

36 true value thereof, the value of the article used shall
be

37 determined as nearly as possible according to the retail
selling

HB 1706 p. 4

_1 price at place of use of similar products of like
quality and

_2 character under such rules as the department of revenue
may

_3 prescribe.

_4 (b) In case the articles used are acquired by
bailment, the

_5 value of the use of the articles so used shall be in an
amount

_6 representing a reasonable rental for the use of the
articles so

_7 bailed, determined as nearly as possible according to
the value of

_8 such use at the places of use of similar products of
like quality

_9 and character under such rules as the department of
revenue may

10 prescribe. In case any such articles of tangible
personal property

11 are used in respect to the construction, repairing,
decorating, or

12 improving of, and which become or are to become an
ingredient or

13 component of, new or existing buildings or other
structures under,

14 upon, or above real property of or for the United
States, any

15 instrumentality thereof, or a county or city housing
authority

16 created pursuant to chapter 35.82 RCW, including the
installing or

17 attaching of any such articles therein or thereto, whether
or not

18 such personal property becomes a part of the realty by
virtue of

19 installation, then the value of the use of such articles
so used

20 shall be determined according to the retail selling
price of such

21 articles, or in the absence of such a selling price, as
nearly as

22 possible according to the retail selling price at place
of use of

23 similar products of like quality and character or, in
the absence

24 of either of these selling price measures, such value
may be

25 determined upon a cost basis, in any event under such
rules as the

26 department of revenue may prescribe.

27 (c) In the case of articles owned by a user engaged
in business

28 outside the state which are brought into the state for
no more

29 than one hundred eighty days in any period of three
hundred sixty-

30 five consecutive days and which are temporarily used for
business

31 purposes by the person in this state, the value of the
article

32 used shall be an amount representing a reasonable rental
for the

33 use of the articles, unless the person has paid tax
under this

34 chapter or chapter 82.08 RCW upon the full value of the
article

35 used, as defined in (a) of this subsection.

36 (d) In the case of articles manufactured or produced
by the

37 user and used in the manufacture or production of
products sold or

p. 5 HB
1706

_1 to be sold to the department of defense of the United
States, the

_2 value of the articles used shall be determined according
to the

_3 value of the ingredients of such articles.

_4 (e) In the case of an article manufactured or
produced for

_5 purposes of serving as a prototype for the development
of a new or

_6 improved product, the value of the article used shall be

_7 determined by: (i) The retail selling price of such new
or

_8 improved product when first offered for sale; or (ii)
the value of

_9 materials incorporated into the prototype in cases in
which the

10 new or improved product is not offered for sale.

11 (f) In the case of an article purchased with a
direct pay

12 permit under section 2 of this act, the value of the
article used

13 shall be determined by the retail selling price, as
defined in RCW

14 82.08.010, of such article if but for the use of the
direct pay

15 permit the transaction would have been subject to sales
tax;

16 (2) "Use," "used,"
"using," or "put to use" shall have their

17 ordinary meaning, and shall mean the first act within
this state

18 by which the taxpayer takes or assumes dominion or
control over

19 the article of tangible personal property (as a
consumer), and

20 include installation, storage, withdrawal from storage,
or any

21 other act preparatory to subsequent actual use or
consumption

22 within this state;

23 (3) "Taxpayer" and "purchaser"
include all persons included

24 within the meaning of the word "buyer" and the
word "consumer" as

25 defined in chapters 82.04 and 82.08 RCW;

26 (4) "Retailer" means every seller as
defined in RCW 82.08.010

27 and every person engaged in the business of selling
tangible

28 personal property at retail and every person required to
collect

29 from purchasers the tax imposed under this chapter;

30 (5) The meaning ascribed to words and phrases in
chapters 82.04

31 and 82.08 RCW, insofar as applicable, shall have full
force and

32 effect with respect to taxes imposed under the
provisions of this

33 chapter. "Consumer," in addition to the
meaning ascribed to it in

34 chapters 82.04 and 82.08 RCW insofar as applicable,
shall also

35 mean any person who distributes or displays, or causes
to be

36 distributed or displayed, any article of tangible
personal

37 property, except newspapers, the primary purpose of
which is to

38 promote the sale of products or services.

HB 1706 p. 6

_1

_2 Sec. 4. RCW
82.08.050 and 1993 sp.s. c 25 s 704 are each amended

_3 to read as follows:

_4 The tax hereby imposed shall be paid by the buyer to
the

_5 seller, and each seller shall collect from the buyer the
full

_6 amount of the tax payable in respect to each taxable
sale in

_7 accordance with the schedule of collections adopted by
the

_8 department pursuant to the provisions of RCW 82.08.060.
The tax

_9 required by this chapter, to be collected by the seller,
shall be

10 deemed to be held in trust by the seller until paid to
the

11 department, and any seller who appropriates or converts
the tax

12 collected to his or her own use or to any use other than
the

13 payment of the tax to the extent that the money required
to be

14 collected is not available for payment on the due date
as

15 prescribed in this chapter shall be guilty of a gross
misdemeanor.

16 In case any seller fails to collect the tax herein
imposed or

17 having collected the tax, fails to pay it to the department
in the

18 manner prescribed by this chapter, whether such failure
is the

19 result of his or her own acts or the result of acts or
conditions

20 beyond his or her control, he or she shall,
nevertheless, be

21 personally liable to the state for the amount of the
tax, unless

22 the seller has taken from the buyer in good faith a
properly

23 executed resale certificate under RCW 82.04.470 or a
copy of a

24 direct pay permit issued under section 2 of this act.

25 The amount of tax, until paid by the buyer to the
seller or to

26 the department, shall constitute a debt from the buyer
to the

27 seller and any seller who fails or refuses to collect
the tax as

28 required with intent to violate the provisions of this
chapter or

29 to gain some advantage or benefit, either direct or
indirect, and

30 any buyer who refuses to pay any tax due under this
chapter shall

31 be guilty of a misdemeanor. The tax required by this
chapter to be

32 collected by the seller shall be stated separately from
the

33 selling price in any sales invoice or other instrument
of sale. On

34 all retail sales through vending machines, the tax need
not be

35 stated separately from the selling price or collected
separately

36 from the buyer. For purposes of determining the tax due
from the

37 buyer to the seller and from the seller to the
department it shall

38 be conclusively presumed that the selling price quoted
in any

p. 7 HB
1706

_1 price list, sales document, contract or other agreement
between

_2 the parties does not include the tax imposed by this
chapter, but

_3 if the seller advertises the price as including the tax
or that

_4 the seller is paying the tax, the advertised price shall
not be

_5 considered the selling price.

_6 Where a buyer has failed to pay to the seller the
tax imposed

_7 by this chapter and the seller has not paid the amount
of the tax

_8 to the department, the department may, in its
discretion, proceed

_9 directly against the buyer for collection of the tax, in
which

10 case a penalty of ten percent may be added to the amount
of the

11 tax for failure of the buyer to pay the same to the
seller,

12 regardless of when the tax may be collected by the
department; and

13 all of the provisions of chapter 82.32 RCW, including
those

14 relative to interest and penalties, shall apply in
addition; and,

15 for the sole purpose of applying the various provisions
of chapter

16 82.32 RCW, the twenty-fifth day of the month following
the tax

17 period in which the purchase was made shall be
considered as the

18 due date of the tax.

19 Sec. 5. RCW
82.12.040 and 1986 c 48 s 1 are each amended to read

20 as follows:

21 (1) Every person who maintains in this state a place
of

22 business or a stock of goods, or engages in business
activities

23 within this state, shall obtain from the department a
certificate

24 of registration, and shall, at the time of making sales,
or making

25 transfers of either possession or title or both, of
tangible

26 personal property for use in this state, collect from
the

27 purchasers or transferees the tax imposed under this
chapter. For

28 the purposes of this chapter, the phrase "maintains
in this state

29 a place of business" shall include the solicitation
of sales

30 and/or taking of orders by sales agents or traveling

31 representatives. For the purposes of this chapter,
"engages in

32 business activity within this state" includes every
activity which

33 is sufficient under the Constitution of the United
States for this

34 state to require collection of tax under this chapter.
The

35 department shall in rules specify activities which
constitute

36 engaging in business activity within this state, and
shall keep

HB 1706 p. 8

_1 the rules current with future court interpretations of
the

_2 Constitution of the United States.

_3 (2) Every person who engages in this state in the
business of

_4 acting as an independent selling agent for persons who
do not hold

_5 a valid certificate of registration, and who receives
compensation

_6 by reason of sales of tangible personal property of his
principals

_7 made for use in this state, shall, at the time such
sales are

_8 made, collect from the purchasers the tax imposed under
this

_9 chapter, and for that purpose shall be deemed a retailer
as

10 defined in this chapter.

11 (3) The tax required to be collected by this chapter
shall be

12 deemed to be held in trust by the retailer until paid to
the

13 department and any retailer who appropriates or converts
the tax

14 collected to his own use or to any use other than the
payment of

15 the tax provided herein to the extent that the money
required to

16 be collected is not available for payment on the due
date as

17 prescribed shall be guilty of a misdemeanor. In case
any seller

18 fails to collect the tax herein imposed or having
collected the

19 tax, fails to pay the same to the department in the
manner

20 prescribed, whether such failure is the result of his
own acts or

21 the result of acts or conditions beyond his control, he
shall

22 nevertheless, be personally liable to the state for the
amount of

23 such tax, unless the seller has taken from the buyer
in good faith

24 a copy of a direct pay permit issued under section 2
of this act.

25 (4) Any retailer who refunds, remits, or rebates to
a

26 purchaser, or transferee, either directly or indirectly,
and by

27 whatever means, all or any part of the tax levied by
this chapter

28 shall be guilty of a misdemeanor.

29 NEW SECTION. Sec. 6. The code reviser
shall place cross-

30 reference sections to section 2 of this act in chapters
82.08,

31 82.12, and 82.14 RCW.

32 NEW SECTION. Sec. 7. This act takes effect
August 1, 2001.

‑‑‑ END ‑‑‑

p. 9 HB
1706