BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF
WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec.
1. The legislature finds
that the safety of minors is of paramount importance. In the past, the legislature
passed laws providing for background checks for employees and volunteers in the
K-12 schools. The legislature finds that high school students participating in
the running start program at a public institution of higher education do not
receive the same protections as they receive in their high school.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
2. A new section is added
to chapter 28B.10 RCW to read as follows:

(1) Institutions of
higher education shall perform a fingerprint-based criminal history records
check for conviction records through the Washington state patrol criminal
identification system for the purpose of conducting preemployment evaluations
of new employees who will have unsupervised contact with minors.

(2) If a prospective new
employee has resided in the state of Washington for fewer than three years, a
fingerprint-based criminal history records check for conviction records shall
be conducted through the federal bureau of investigation.

(3) When necessary, the
prospective new employee may be employed on a conditional basis pending the
completion of the investigation.

(4) If the prospective
new employee has had a criminal history records check by the Washington state
patrol or the federal bureau of investigation within the previous two years,
the institution of higher education may waive the requirement.

(5) The institution of
higher education shall provide a copy of the record report to the prospective
employee.

(6) The higher
education coordinating board shall establish a list of criminal offenses that
will disqualify a prospective employee from being hired by the institution of
higher education. The conviction must be for a felony committed within the
past ten years.

(7) The
fees associated with the criminal history records check shall be paid by the
requesting institution of higher education.

---
END ---