BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF
WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec.
1. A new section is added
to chapter 81.77 RCW to read as follows:

(1) This chapter does
not apply to persons who, in conjunction with hauling their own residential
solid waste, haul solid waste from five or fewer neighboring residences within
a one-month period and who do not solicit to haul solid waste from those neighboring
residences.

(2) This
chapter does not apply to persons who haul construction, demolition, and land
clearing debris if that person hauls construction, demolition, or land clearing
debris as an incidental adjunct to some other established construction agreement
and does not solicit to haul that debris.

--- END ---