BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF
WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1. RCW 35.21.860 and 2000 c
83 s 8 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) No city or town may
impose a franchise fee or any other fee or charge of whatever nature or
description upon the light and power, or gas distribution businesses, as
defined in RCW 82.16.010, or telephone business, as defined in RCW 82.04.065,
or service provider for use of the right of way, except:

(a) A tax authorized by
RCW 35.21.865 may be imposed;

(b) A fee may be
charged to such businesses or service providers that recovers actual
administrative expenses incurred by a city or town that are directly related to
receiving and approving a permit, license, and franchise, to inspecting plans
and construction, or to the preparation of a detailed statement pursuant to
chapter 43.21C RCW;

(c) Taxes permitted by
state law on service providers;

(d) Franchise
requirements and fees for cable television services as allowed by federal law;
and

(e) A site-specific
charge pursuant to an agreement between the city or town and a service provider
of personal wireless services acceptable to the parties for:

(i) The placement of
new structures in the right of way regardless of height, unless the new structure
is the result of a mandated relocation in which case no charge will be imposed
if the previous location was not charged;

(ii) The placement of
replacement structures when the replacement is necessary for the installation
or attachment of wireless facilities, and the overall height of the replacement
structure and the wireless facility is more than sixty feet; or

(iii) The placement of
personal wireless facilities on structures owned by the city or town located in
the right of way. However, a site-specific charge shall not apply to the
placement of personal wireless facilities on existing structures, unless the
structure is owned by the city or town.

A city or town is not
required to approve the use permit for the placement of a facility for personal
wireless services that meets one of the criteria in this subsection absent such
an agreement. If the parties are unable to agree on the amount of the charge,
the service provider may submit the amount of the charge to binding arbitration
by serving notice on the city or town. Within thirty days of receipt of the
initial notice, each party shall furnish a list of acceptable arbitrators. The
parties shall select an arbitrator; failing to agree on an arbitrator, each
party shall select one arbitrator and the two arbitrators shall select a third
arbitrator for an arbitration panel. The arbitrator or arbitrators shall
determine the charge based on comparable siting agreements involving public
land and rights of way. The arbitrator or arbitrators shall not decide any
other disputed issues, including but not limited to size, location, and zoning
requirements. Costs of the arbitration, including compensation for the
arbitrator's services, must be borne equally by the parties participating in
the arbitration and each party shall bear its own costs and expenses, including
legal fees and witness expenses, in connection with the arbitration proceeding.

(2) Subsection (1) of
this section does not prohibit franchise fees imposed on an electrical energy,
natural gas, or telephone business, by contract existing on April 20, 1982,
with a city or town, for the duration of the contract, but the franchise fees
shall be considered taxes for the purposes of the limitations established in
RCW 35.21.865 and 35.21.870 to the extent the fees exceed the costs allowable
under subsection (1) of this section.

(3) Any franchise
fee imposed upon solid waste collection or transportation businesses or
services shall be limited to the amount necessary to recover actual
administrative expenses incurred by a city or town that are directly related to
receiving and approving a permit, contract, license, and franchise to a solid
waste collection or transportation business or service, to inspecting plans and
construction, or to the preparation of a detailed statement pursuant to chapter
43.21C RCW.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
2. A new section is added
to chapter 36.58 RCW to read as follows:

Any
franchise fee imposed upon solid waste collection or transportation businesses
or services shall be limited to the amount necessary to recover actual
administrative expenses incurred by a county that are directly related to
receiving and approving a permit, contract, license, and franchise to a solid
waste collection or transportation business or service, to inspecting plans and
construction, or to the preparation of a detailed statement pursuant to chapter
43.21C RCW.

---
END ---