BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF
WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1. RCW 47.36.330 and 1999 c
213 s 2 and 1999 c 201 s 5 are each reenacted and amended to read as follows:

(1) Not more than six
business signs may be permitted on motorist information sign panels authorized
by RCW 47.36.310 and 47.36.320.

(2) The maximum distance
that eligible service facilities may be located on either side of an
interchange or intersection to qualify for a business sign are as follows:

(a) On interstate
highways, gas, food, or lodging activities shall be located within three
miles. Camping or tourist-oriented activities shall be within five miles.

(b) On noninterstate
highways, gas, food, lodging, recreation, or tourist-oriented activities shall
be located within five miles.

(3)(a) If no eligible
services are located within the distance limits prescribed in subsection (2) of
this section, the distance limits shall be increased until an eligible service
of a type being considered is reached, up to a maximum of fifteen miles.

(b) The department may
erect and maintain signs on an alternate route that is longer than fifteen
miles if it is safer and still provides reasonable and convenient travel to an
eligible service.

(c) The department may
erect and maintain signs on a route up to a maximum of twenty miles if it
qualifies as an eligible service and is within a distressed area under the
criteria of chapter 43.165 RCW.

(4) The
distance limits of this section do not apply to noninterstate highways that end
at a destination location.

--- END ---