BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF
WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1. RCW 46.55.120 and 2000 c
193 s 1 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) Vehicles or other
items of personal property registered or titled with the department that are
impounded by registered tow truck operators pursuant to RCW 46.55.080,
46.55.085, 46.55.113, or 9A.88.140 may be redeemed only under the following
circumstances:

(a) Only the legal
owner, the registered owner, a person authorized in writing by the registered
owner or the vehicle's insurer, a person who is determined and verified by the
operator to have the permission of the registered owner of the vehicle or other
item of personal property registered or titled with the department, or one who
has purchased a vehicle or item of personal property registered or titled with
the department from the registered owner who produces proof of ownership or
written authorization and signs a receipt therefor, may redeem an impounded
vehicle or items of personal property registered or titled with the
department. In addition, a vehicle impounded because the operator is in
violation of RCW 46.20.342(1)(c) shall not be released until a person eligible
to redeem it under this subsection (1)(a) satisfies the requirements of (((e)))
(f) of this subsection, including paying all towing, removal, and
storage fees, notwithstanding the fact that the hold was ordered by a
government agency. If the department's records show that the operator has been
convicted of a violation of RCW 46.20.342 or a similar local ordinance within
the past five years, the vehicle may be held for up to thirty days at the
written direction of the agency ordering the vehicle impounded. A vehicle
impounded because the operator is arrested for a violation of RCW 46.20.342 may
be released only pursuant to a written order from the agency that ordered the
vehicle impounded or from the court having jurisdiction. An agency may issue a
written order to release pursuant to a provision of an applicable state agency
rule or local ordinance authorizing release on the basis of economic or
personal hardship to the spouse of the operator, taking into consideration
public safety factors, including the operator's criminal history and driving
record.

If a vehicle is
impounded because the operator is in violation of RCW 46.20.342(1) (a) or (b),
the vehicle may be held for up to thirty days at the written direction of the
agency ordering the vehicle impounded. However, if the department's records
show that the operator has been convicted of a violation of RCW 46.20.342(1)
(a) or (b) or a similar local ordinance within the past five years, the vehicle
may be held at the written direction of the agency ordering the vehicle
impounded for up to sixty days, and for up to ninety days if the operator has
two or more such prior offenses. If a vehicle is impounded because the
operator is arrested for a violation of RCW 46.20.342, the vehicle may not be
released until a person eligible to redeem it under this subsection (1)(a)
satisfies the requirements of (((e))) (f) of this subsection,
including paying all towing, removal, and storage fees, notwithstanding the
fact that the hold was ordered by a government agency.

(b) If the vehicle is
directed to be held for a suspended license impound, a person who desires to
redeem the vehicle at the end of the period of impound shall within five days
of the impound at the request of the tow truck operator pay a security deposit
to the tow truck operator of not more than one-half of the applicable impound
storage rate for each day of the proposed suspended license impound. The tow
truck operator shall credit this amount against the final bill for removal,
towing, and storage upon redemption. The tow truck operator may accept other
sufficient security in lieu of the security deposit. If the person desiring to
redeem the vehicle does not pay the security deposit or provide other security
acceptable to the tow truck operator, the tow truck operator may process and
sell at auction the vehicle as an abandoned vehicle within the normal time
limits set out in RCW 46.55.130(1). The security deposit required by this
section may be paid and must be accepted at any time up to twenty-four hours
before the beginning of the auction to sell the vehicle as abandoned. The
registered owner is not eligible to purchase the vehicle at the auction, and
the tow truck operator shall sell the vehicle to the highest bidder who is not
the registered owner.

(c) Notwithstanding (b)
of this subsection, a rental car business may immediately redeem a rental
vehicle it owns by payment of the costs of removal, towing, and storage,
whereupon the vehicle will not be held for a suspended license impound.

(d) Notwithstanding
(b) of this subsection, if the owner of a commercial vehicle who was not the
driver of the commercial vehicle at the time of the commercial vehicle's
impoundment signs a sworn affidavit or declaration attesting to the owner's
lack of knowledge of the driver's suspended license and additionally attesting
to the existence of business policies in place at the time of the impoundment
requiring the driver of a commercial vehicle whose license is suspended to
notify the owner of the vehicle of the suspension, the owner may immediately
redeem a commercial vehicle he or she owns by payment of the costs of removal,
towing, and storage, whereupon the vehicle will not be held for a suspended
license impound. In the case of a corporate owner, the duly authorized agent
of the corporation may attest on behalf of the corporation.

(e)
Notwithstanding (b) of this subsection, a motor vehicle dealer or lender with a
perfected security interest in the vehicle may redeem or lawfully repossess a
vehicle immediately by payment of the costs of removal, towing, and storage,
whereupon the vehicle will not be held for a suspended license impound. A
motor vehicle dealer or lender with a perfected security interest in the
vehicle may not knowingly and intentionally engage in collusion with a
registered owner to repossess and then return or resell a vehicle to the
registered owner in an attempt to avoid a suspended license impound. However,
this provision does not preclude a vehicle dealer or a lender with a perfected
security interest in the vehicle from repossessing the vehicle and then
selling, leasing, or otherwise disposing of it in accordance with chapter 62A.9A
RCW, including providing redemption rights to the debtor under RCW ((62A.9-506))
62A.9A-623. If the debtor is the registered owner of the vehicle, the
debtor's right to redeem the vehicle under chapter 62A.9A RCW is
conditioned upon the debtor obtaining and providing proof from the impounding
authority or court having jurisdiction that any fines, penalties, and
forfeitures owed by the registered owner, as a result of the suspended license
impound, have been paid, and proof of the payment must be tendered to the
vehicle dealer or lender at the time the debtor tenders all other obligations required
to redeem the vehicle. Vehicle dealers or lenders are not liable for damages
if they rely in good faith on an order from the impounding agency or a court in
releasing a vehicle held under a suspended license impound.

(((e))) (f)
The vehicle or other item of personal property registered or titled with the
department shall be released upon the presentation to any person having custody
of the vehicle of commercially reasonable tender sufficient to cover the costs
of towing, storage, or other services rendered during the course of towing,
removing, impounding, or storing any such vehicle, with credit being given for
the amount of any security deposit paid under (b) of this subsection. In
addition, if a vehicle is impounded because the operator was arrested for a
violation of RCW 46.20.342 or 46.20.345 and was being operated by the
registered owner when it was impounded under local ordinance or agency rule, it
must not be released to any person until the registered owner establishes with
the agency that ordered the vehicle impounded or the court having jurisdiction
that any penalties, fines, or forfeitures owed by him or her have been
satisfied. Registered tow truck operators are not liable for damages if they
rely in good faith on an order from the impounding agency or a court in
releasing a vehicle held under a suspended license impound. Commercially
reasonable tender shall include, without limitation, cash, major bank credit
cards issued by financial institutions, or personal checks drawn on Washington
state branches of financial institutions if accompanied by two pieces of valid
identification, one of which may be required by the operator to have a
photograph. If the towing firm cannot determine through the customer's bank or
a check verification service that the presented check would be paid by the bank
or guaranteed by the service, the towing firm may refuse to accept the check.
Any person who stops payment on a personal check or credit card, or does not
make restitution within ten days from the date a check becomes insufficient due
to lack of funds, to a towing firm that has provided a service pursuant to this
section or in any other manner defrauds the towing firm in connection with
services rendered pursuant to this section shall be liable for damages in the
amount of twice the towing and storage fees, plus costs and reasonable
attorney's fees.

(2)(a) The registered
tow truck operator shall give to each person who seeks to redeem an impounded
vehicle, or item of personal property registered or titled with the department,
written notice of the right of redemption and opportunity for a hearing, which
notice shall be accompanied by a form to be used for requesting a hearing, the
name of the person or agency authorizing the impound, and a copy of the towing
and storage invoice. The registered tow truck operator shall maintain a record
evidenced by the redeeming person's signature that such notification was
provided.

(b) Any person seeking
to redeem an impounded vehicle under this section has a right to a hearing in
the district or municipal court for the jurisdiction in which the vehicle was
impounded to contest the validity of the impoundment or the amount of towing
and storage charges. The district court has jurisdiction to determine the
issues involving all impoundments including those authorized by the state or
its agents. The municipal court has jurisdiction to determine the issues
involving impoundments authorized by agents of the municipality. Any request
for a hearing shall be made in writing on the form provided for that purpose
and must be received by the appropriate court within ten days of the date the
opportunity was provided for in subsection (2)(a) of this section and more than
five days before the date of the auction. At the time of the filing of the
hearing request, the petitioner shall pay to the court clerk a filing fee in
the same amount required for the filing of a suit in district court. If the
hearing request is not received by the court within the ten-day period, the
right to a hearing is waived and the registered owner is liable for any towing,
storage, or other impoundment charges permitted under this chapter. Upon
receipt of a timely hearing request, the court shall proceed to hear and
determine the validity of the impoundment.

(3)(a) The court,
within five days after the request for a hearing, shall notify the registered
tow truck operator, the person requesting the hearing if not the owner, the
registered and legal owners of the vehicle or other item of personal property
registered or titled with the department, and the person or agency authorizing
the impound in writing of the hearing date and time.

(b) At the hearing, the
person or persons requesting the hearing may produce any relevant evidence to
show that the impoundment, towing, or storage fees charged were not proper.
The court may consider a written report made under oath by the officer who
authorized the impoundment in lieu of the officer's personal appearance at the
hearing.

(c) At the conclusion
of the hearing, the court shall determine whether the impoundment was proper,
whether the towing or storage fees charged were in compliance with the posted
rates, and who is responsible for payment of the fees. The court may not
adjust fees or charges that are in compliance with the posted or contracted
rates.

(d) If the impoundment
is found proper, the impoundment, towing, and storage fees as permitted under
this chapter together with court costs shall be assessed against the person or
persons requesting the hearing, unless the operator did not have a signed and
valid impoundment authorization from a private property owner or an authorized
agent.

(e) If the impoundment
is determined to be in violation of this chapter, then the registered and legal
owners of the vehicle or other item of personal property registered or titled
with the department shall bear no impoundment, towing, or storage fees, and any
security shall be returned or discharged as appropriate, and the person or
agency who authorized the impoundment shall be liable for any towing, storage,
or other impoundment fees permitted under this chapter. The court shall enter
judgment in favor of the registered tow truck operator against the person or
agency authorizing the impound for the impoundment, towing, and storage fees
paid. In addition, the court shall enter judgment in favor of the registered
and legal owners of the vehicle, or other item of personal property registered
or titled with the department, for the amount of the filing fee required by law
for the impound hearing petition as well as reasonable damages for loss of the
use of the vehicle during the time the same was impounded, for not less than
fifty dollars per day, against the person or agency authorizing the impound.
However, if an impoundment arising from an alleged violation of RCW 46.20.342
or 46.20.345 is determined to be in violation of this chapter, then the law
enforcement officer directing the impoundment and the government employing the
officer are not liable for damages if the officer relied in good faith and
without gross negligence on the records of the department in ascertaining that
the operator of the vehicle had a suspended or revoked driver's license. If
any judgment entered is not paid within fifteen days of notice in writing of
its entry, the court shall award reasonable attorneys' fees and costs against
the defendant in any action to enforce the judgment. Notice of entry of
judgment may be made by registered or certified mail, and proof of mailing may
be made by affidavit of the party mailing the notice. Notice of the entry of
the judgment shall read essentially as follows:

TO: . . . . . .

YOU
ARE HEREBY NOTIFIED JUDGMENT was entered against you in the
. . . . . . Court located at
. . . . . . in the sum of
$. . . . . ., in an action entitled
. . . . . ., Case No. . . . . YOU ARE
FURTHER NOTIFIED that attorneys fees and costs will be awarded against you
under RCW . . . if the judgment is not paid within 15 days of the
date of this notice.

DATED
this . . . . day of . . . . . ., (year)
. . .

Signature
..................

Typed
name and address

of
party mailing notice

(4) Any
impounded abandoned vehicle or item of personal property registered or titled
with the department that is not redeemed within fifteen days of mailing of the
notice of custody and sale as required by RCW 46.55.110(3) shall be sold at
public auction in accordance with all the provisions and subject to all the
conditions of RCW 46.55.130. A vehicle or item of personal property registered
or titled with the department may be redeemed at any time before the start of
the auction upon payment of the applicable towing and storage fees.

--- END ---