BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF
WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec.
1. The legislature finds and
declares:

(1) That soldiers who
were members of the government of the Commonwealth of the Philippines military
forces who were in the service of the United States of America on July 31,
1941, including the organized guerrilla forces under commanders appointed,
designated, or subsequently recognized by the Commander in Chief of the
Southwest Pacific Area or other competent authority in the Army of the United
States, performed an invaluable function during World War II.

(2) It is in the public
interest for the state of Washington to recognize those courageous soldiers who
fought and defended American interests during World War II and who are
currently receiving supplemental state benefits under RCW 74.04.620 as of
December 14, 1999, by permitting them to return to their homeland to spend
their last days without a complete forfeiture of benefits.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
2. A new section is added
to chapter 74.04 RCW to read as follows:

(1) Notwithstanding any
other provision of law, any person receiving benefits under RCW 74.04.620 on
December 14, 1999, and who meets the requirements of subsection (2) of this
section is eligible to receive benefits under this section although he or she
does not retain a residence in the state and returns to the Republic of the
Philippines, if he or she maintains a permanent residence in the Republic of
the Philippines without any lapse of his or her presence in the Republic of the
Philippines.

(2) A person subject to
subsection (1) of this section is eligible to receive benefits pursuant to this
section if he or she was receiving benefits pursuant to RCW 74.04.620 on
December 14, 1999, and meets both the following requirements:

(a) He or she is a
veteran of World War II; and

(b)(i) He or she was a
member of the government of the Commonwealth of the Philippines military forces
who was in the service of the United States on July 26, 1941, or thereafter; or

(ii) He or she was a
Regular Philippine Scout who enlisted in Filipino-manned units of the United
States Army prior to October 6, 1945; or

(iii) He or she was a
member of the Special Philippine Scouts who enlisted in the United States Armed
Forces between October 6, 1945, and June 30, 1947.

(3) Within funds
appropriated for this purpose, the department is authorized to make a one-time
lump sum payment of one thousand five hundred dollars to each person eligible
for benefits under this section.

(a) Benefits paid under
this section are in lieu of benefits paid under RCW 74.04.620 for the period
for which the benefits are paid.

(b) Benefits are to be
paid under this section for any period during which the recipient is receiving
benefits under Title 8 of the federal Social Security Act as a result of the
application of federal Public Law 106‑169, subject to any limitations
imposed by this section.

(4) This
section applies only to an individual who returns to the Republic of the
Philippines for the period during which the individual establishes and
maintains a residence in the Republic of the Philippines.

---
END ---