BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF
WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec.
1. In 1993, the legislature
authorized employees of institutions of higher education to exercise an option
to be governed under the public employees' collective bargaining act, chapter
41.56 RCW, rather than the state civil service law, chapter 41.06 RCW. Currently,
some University of Washington employees are governed by chapter 41.56 RCW,
while others with the identical classifications are governed by chapter 41.06
RCW.

Legislation was adopted
in 1996 to allow salary adjustments and readjustments for groups of state
employees covered under the state civil service law. These adjustments allow
the Washington personnel resources board to address recruitment and retention
issues, correct salary compression or inversion problems, recognize increased
duties and responsibilities, and correct salary inequities. The law as passed
did not recognize employees who had exercised their option to bargain
collectively under chapter 41.56 RCW.

The purpose of this act
is to apply any salary adjustments made under RCW 41.06.152(2) for employees
subject to chapter 41.06 RCW to employees of institutions of higher education
who are in identical or substantially similar classifications and who have
elected to be governed under chapter 41.56 RCW. Inclusion of these employees in
any such salary adjustments would help achieve the desired result of easing
recruitment and retention problems.

Sec. 2. RCW 41.06.152 and 1999 c
309 s 914 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) The board shall
adopt only those job classification revisions, class studies, and salary
adjustments under RCW 41.06.150(15) that:

(a) Are due to
documented recruitment and retention difficulties, salary compression or
inversion, increased duties and responsibilities, or inequities. For these
purposes, inequities are defined as similar work assigned to different job
classes with a salary disparity greater than 7.5 percent; and

(b) Are such that the
office of financial management has reviewed the agency's fiscal impact
statement and has concurred that the agency can absorb the biennialized cost of
the reclassification, class study, or salary adjustment within the agency's
current authorized level of funding for the current fiscal biennium and
subsequent fiscal biennia.

(2) In addition to
reclassifications, class studies, and salary adjustments under subsection
(1)(b) of this section, the board may approve other reclassifications, class
studies, and salary adjustments that meet the requirements of subsection (1)(a)
of this section and have been approved under the procedures established under
this subsection.

Before the department
of personnel's biennial budget request is due to the office of financial
management, the board shall prioritize requests for reclassifications, class
studies, and salary adjustments for the next fiscal biennium. The board shall
prioritize according to such criteria as are developed by the board consistent
with RCW 41.06.150(15)(a).

The board shall submit
the prioritized list to the governor's office and the fiscal committees of the
house of representatives and senate at the same time the department of
personnel's biennial budget request is submitted. The office of financial
management shall review the biennial cost of each proposed salary adjustment on
the board's prioritized list.

In the biennial
appropriations acts, the legislature may establish a level of funding, from the
state general fund and other accounts, to be applied by the board to the
prioritized list. Upon enactment of the appropriations act, the board may
approve reclassifications, class studies, and salary adjustments only to the
extent that the total cost does not exceed the level of funding established in
the appropriations acts and the board's actions are consistent with the
priorities established in the list. The legislature may also specify or
otherwise limit in the appropriations act the implementation dates for actions
approved by the board under this section.

(3) When the board
develops its priority list in the 1999-2001 biennium, for increases proposed
for funding in the 2001-2003 biennium, the board shall give top priority to
proposed increases to address documented recruitment and retention increases,
and shall give lowest priority to proposed increases to recognize increased duties
and responsibilities. When the board submits its prioritized list for the
2001-2003 biennium, the board shall also provide: A comparison of any
differences between the salary increases recommended by the department of
personnel staff and those adopted by the board; a review of any salary
compression, inversion, or inequities that would result from implementing a
recommended increase; and a complete description of the information relied upon
by the board in adopting its proposals and priorities.

(4) This section
applies to employees of institutions of higher education who are in identical
or substantially similar classifications represented by an exclusive bargaining
representative that has exercised its option under RCW 41.56.201 to have its
relationship and obligations governed by chapter 41.56 RCW. Such
classifications shall be treated in a manner identical to classifications under
this chapter and shall be included in all budget requests submitted under this
chapter.

(5) This section
does not apply to the higher education hospital special pay plan or to any
adjustments to the classification plan under RCW 41.06.150(15) that are due to
emergent conditions. Emergent conditions are defined as emergency conditions
requiring the establishment of positions necessary for the preservation of the
public health, safety, or general welfare.

Sec. 3. RCW 41.56.201 and 2000 c
19 s 2 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) At any time after
July 1, 1993, an institution of higher education and the exclusive bargaining
representative of a bargaining unit of employees classified under chapter
28B.16 or 41.06 RCW as appropriate may exercise their option to have their
relationship and corresponding obligations governed entirely by the provisions
of this chapter by complying with the following:

(a) The parties will
file notice of the parties' intent to be so governed, subject to the mutual
adoption of a collective bargaining agreement permitted by this section
recognizing the notice of intent. The parties shall provide the notice to the
Washington personnel resources board or its successor and the commission;

(b) During the
negotiation of an initial contract between the parties under this chapter, the
parties' scope of bargaining shall be governed by this chapter and any disputes
arising out of the collective bargaining rights and obligations under this
subsection shall be determined by the commission. If the commission finds that
the parties are at impasse, the notice filed under (a) of this subsection shall
be void and have no effect; and

(c) On the first day of
the month following the month during which the institution of higher education
and the exclusive bargaining representative provide notice to the Washington
personnel resources board or its successor and the commission that they have
executed an initial collective bargaining agreement recognizing the notice of
intent filed under (a) of this subsection, chapter 28B.16 or 41.06 RCW as
appropriate shall cease to apply to all employees in the bargaining unit
covered by the agreement.

(2) All collective
bargaining rights and obligations concerning relations between an institution
of higher education and the exclusive bargaining representative of its
employees who have agreed to exercise the option permitted by this section
shall be determined under this chapter, subject to the following:

(a) The commission
shall recognize, in its current form, the bargaining unit as certified by the
Washington personnel resources board or its successor. For purposes of
determining bargaining unit status, positions meeting the criteria established
under RCW 41.06.070 or its successor shall be excluded from coverage under this
chapter. An employer may exclude such positions from a bargaining unit at any
time the position meets the criteria established under RCW 41.06.070 or its
successor. The limitations on collective bargaining contained in RCW 41.56.100
shall not apply to that bargaining unit.

(b) If, on the date of
filing the notice under subsection (1)(a) of this section, there is a union
shop authorized for the bargaining unit under rules adopted by the Washington
personnel resources board or its successor, the union shop requirement shall
continue in effect for the bargaining unit and shall be deemed incorporated
into the collective bargaining agreement applicable to the bargaining unit.

(c) Salary increases
negotiated for the employees in the bargaining unit shall be subject to the following:

(i) Salary increases
shall continue to be appropriated by the legislature. The exclusive bargaining
representative shall meet before a legislative session with the governor or
governor's designee and the representative of the institution of higher
education concerning the total dollar amount for salary increases and health
care contributions that will be contained in the appropriations proposed by the
governor under RCW 43.88.060;

(ii) The collective
bargaining agreements may provide for salary increases from local efficiency
savings that are different from or that exceed the amount or percentage for
salary increases provided by the legislature in the omnibus appropriations act
for the institution of higher education or allocated to the board of trustees
by the state board for community and technical colleges, but the base for
salary increases provided by the legislature under (c)(i) of this subsection
shall include only those amounts appropriated by the legislature, and the base
shall not include any additional salary increases provided under this
subsection (2)(c)(ii);

(iii) Any provisions of
the collective bargaining agreements pertaining to salary increases provided
under (c)(i) of this subsection shall be subject to modification by the legislature.
If any provision of a salary increase provided under (c)(i) of this subsection
is changed by subsequent modification of the appropriations act by the
legislature, both parties shall immediately enter into collective bargaining
for the sole purpose of arriving at a mutually agreed upon replacement for the
modified provision;

(iv) Any and all
funding increases adopted under RCW 41.06.152(2) shall also apply to the
employees who are in identical or substantially similar classifications under
the collective bargaining unit.

(3)
Nothing in this section may be construed to permit an institution of higher
education to bargain collectively with an exclusive bargaining representative
concerning any matter covered by: (a) Chapter 41.05 RCW, except for the related
cost or dollar contributions or additional or supplemental benefits as
permitted by chapter 492, Laws of 1993; or (b) chapter 41.32 or 41.40 RCW.

---
END ---