BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF
WASHINGTON:

_4 NEW SECTION. Sec. 1. The department of
social and health

_5 services shall submit and, upon approval, implement a
section 1115

_6 demonstration waiver request to the federal health care
financing

_7 administration to establish a prescription drug
assistance

_8 program. The program must create an expanded coverage
group

_9 composed of any medicare-covered individual with no
medicare

10 supplement policy or retiree health benefit plan that
covers

11 drugs, and other individuals with household incomes up
to three

12 hundred percent of the federal poverty level, as
adjusted annually

13 by the federal department of health and human services,
who do not

14 have insurance coverage or other health benefits for
prescription

15 drugs. Individuals in this expanded coverage group will
receive a

16 financial subsidy for prescription drugs equal to the
average

17 rebate paid to the medicaid program under Title XIX of
the federal

18 social security act by pharmaceutical manufacturers.

‑‑‑ END ‑‑‑

p. 1 HB
1720