BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF
WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec.
1. This act shall be known
as the substance abuse and crime prevention act.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
2. A new section is added
to chapter 9.94A RCW to read as follows:

(1) Community custody.
Notwithstanding the statutory maximum sentence or any other provision of this
chapter, and except as provided in subsection (2) of this section, an offender
convicted of delivery or possession of a controlled substance under chapter
69.50 RCW or a criminal attempt, criminal solicitation, or criminal conspiracy
to commit such a violation under chapter 9A.28 RCW shall be sentenced to
community custody.

(2) Eligibility for
community custody. An offender is ineligible for community custody if:

(a) The offender has,
before the commission of the offense under subsection (1) of this section, been
convicted on two or more separate occasions, whether in this state or
elsewhere, of a felony classified under subsection (1) of this section;

(b) The offender has
current or prior convictions for a sex offense in this state, another state, or
the United States;

(c) The offender has
current convictions for a violent offense in this state, another state, or the
United States;

(d) The offender has
prior convictions for a violent offense in this state, another state, or the
United States unless the offender has spent five consecutive years in the
community without being convicted of any new offenses;

(e) The violation
involves a sentence enhancement under RCW 9.94A.310 (3) or (4);

(f) The violation
involves the manufacture, delivery, or possession with intent to deliver
methamphetamine, its salts, isomers, and salts of its isomers as defined in RCW
69.50.206(d)(2);

(g) The offender
refuses to participate in the crime-related treatment or counseling services
required under subsections (3) and (5) of this section as a condition to his or
her community custody; and

(h) The offender (i)
has been convicted on two separate occasions of delivery or possession of a
controlled substance under chapter 69.50 RCW or a criminal attempt, criminal
solicitation, or criminal conspiracy to commit such a violation under chapter
9A.28 RCW; (ii) has participated in two separate courses of crime-related
treatment or counseling services pursuant to subsection (5) of this section;
and (iii) is found by the court to be unamenable to crime-related treatment or
counseling services pursuant to subsection (5)(c) of this section.

(3) Community
custody conditions. Unless a condition is waived by the court, the term of
community custody for an offender sentenced pursuant to this section shall
include the following conditions:

(a) The offender shall
report to and be available for contact with the assigned community corrections
officer as directed;

(b) The offender shall
work at department of corrections-approved education, employment, and/or
community service;

(c) The offender shall
not possess or consume controlled substances except pursuant to lawfully issued
prescriptions;

(d) The offender shall
participate in crime-related treatment or counseling services pursuant to
subsection (5) of this section;

(e) The offender shall
pay supervision fees as determined by the department of corrections; and

(f) The offender shall
submit to affirmative acts necessary to monitor compliance with the orders of
the court as required by the department.

(4) Affirmative
conditions. As a part of any sentence imposed under subsection (1) of this
section, the court may also order any of the following special conditions:

(a) The offender shall
remain within, or outside of, a specified geographical boundary;

(b) The offender shall
not have direct or indirect contact with the victim of the crime or a specified
class of individuals;

(c) The offender shall
not consume alcohol;

(d) The offender shall,
if reasonably able to do so, contribute to his or her own crime-related
treatment or counseling services required under subsection (5) of this section;
and

(e) The offender shall
comply with any crime-related prohibitions.

(5) Drug
treatment/counseling. (a) Within seven days of an order imposing community
custody under subsection (1) of this section, the department of corrections
shall notify the drug treatment provider designated to provide the
crime-related treatment or counseling services to the offender. Within thirty
days of receiving that notice, the treatment provider shall prepare a treatment
plan and forward it to the department of corrections. On a quarterly basis
after the offender begins the drug treatment program, the treatment provider
shall prepare and forward a progress report to the department of corrections.

(b) If at any point
during the course of drug treatment the treatment provider notifies the
department of corrections that the offender is unamenable to the drug treatment
being provided, but may be amenable to other drug treatments or related
programs, the department may modify the terms of community custody to ensure
that the offender receives the appropriate drug treatment or program. The
department may not impose conditions that are contrary to those ordered by the
court and may not contravene or decrease court-imposed conditions. The
department shall notify the offender in writing of any such conditions or
modifications. In setting, modifying, and enforcing conditions of community
custody, the department shall be deemed to be performing a quasi-judicial
function.

(c) If at any point
during the course of drug treatment the treatment provider notifies the
department that the offender is unamenable to the drug treatment provided and
other forms of drug treatment, the department may petition the court to revoke
community custody. At the revocation hearing, unless the offender proves by a
preponderance of the evidence that there is a drug treatment program to which
he is amenable, the court may revoke community custody and impose other
available sanctions pursuant to subsection (6) of this section.

(d) Crime-related
treatment or counseling services required under subsections (3) and (5) of this
section that are a required condition of community custody may not exceed
twelve months, provided, however, that additional aftercare services as a
condition of community custody may be required for up to six months.

(6) Revocation.
For an offender sentenced to a term of community custody under subsection (1)
of this section, who violates his or her condition of community custody and as
a result has had his or her community custody status revoked by the court, the
court may impose a sanction of up to sixty days for each violation. The court
may impose sanctions such as home detention with electronic monitoring,
inpatient treatment, daily reporting, curfew, community service, education or
counseling services, supervision enhanced through electronic monitoring, or any
other sanctions available in the community.

(7) Dismissal of
charges upon successful completion of drug treatment. At any time after
completion of drug treatment required under subsections (3) and (5) of this
section, an offender may petition the sentencing court for dismissal of the
charges. If the court finds that the offender successfully completed drug
treatment, and substantially complied with the conditions of community custody,
the conviction on which the community custody was based shall be set aside and
the court shall dismiss the indictment or information against the offender. In
addition, the arrest on which the conviction was based shall be deemed to have
never occurred and the offender shall thereafter be released from all penalties
and disabilities resulting from the offense of which he or she has been
convicted.

Sec. 3. RCW 9.94A.120 and 2000 c
226 s 2, 2000 c 43 s 1, and 2000 c 28 s 5 are each reenacted and amended to
read as follows:

(1) When a person is
convicted of a felony, the court shall impose punishment as provided in this
chapter.

(2)(a) The court shall
impose a sentence as provided in the following sections and as applicable in
the case:

(i) Unless another term
of confinement applies, the court shall impose a sentence within the standard
sentence range established in RCW 9.94A.310;

(ii) RCW 9.94A.700 and
9.94A.705, relating to community placement;

(iii) RCW 9.94A.710 and
9.94A.715, relating to community custody;

(iv) RCW 9.94A.383,
relating to community custody for offenders whose term of confinement is one
year or less;

(v) RCW 9.94A.---
(section 2 of this act), relating to community custody for delivery or
possession of a controlled substance;

(vi) RCW
9.94A.560, relating to persistent offenders;

(((vi))) (vii)
RCW 9.94A.590, relating to mandatory minimum terms;

(((vii))) (viii)
RCW 9.94A.650, relating to the first-time offender waiver;

(((viii))) (ix)
RCW 9.94A.660, relating to the drug offender sentencing alternative;

(((ix))) (x)
RCW 9.94A.670, relating to the special sex offender sentencing alternative;

(((x))) (xi)
RCW 9.94A.390, relating to exceptional sentences;

(((xi))) (xii)
RCW 9.94A.400, relating to consecutive and concurrent sentences.

(b) If a standard
sentence range has not been established for the offender's crime, the court
shall impose a determinate sentence which may include not more than one year of
confinement; community service work; until July 1, 2000, a term of community
supervision not to exceed one year and on and after July 1, 2000, a term of
community custody not to exceed one year, subject to conditions and sanctions
as authorized in RCW 9.94A.710 (2) and (3); and/or other legal financial
obligations. The court may impose a sentence which provides more than one year
of confinement if the court finds reasons justifying an exceptional sentence as
provided in RCW 9.94A.390.

(3) If the court
imposes a sentence requiring confinement of thirty days or less, the court may,
in its discretion, specify that the sentence be served on consecutive or
intermittent days. A sentence requiring more than thirty days of confinement
shall be served on consecutive days. Local jail administrators may schedule
court-ordered intermittent sentences as space permits.

(4) If a sentence
imposed includes payment of a legal financial obligation, it shall be imposed
as provided in RCW 9.94A.140, 9.94A.142, and 9.94A.145.

(5) Except as provided
under RCW 9.94A.140(4) and 9.94A.142(4), a court may not impose a sentence
providing for a term of confinement or community supervision, community
placement, or community custody which exceeds the statutory maximum for the
crime as provided in chapter 9A.20 RCW.

(6) The sentencing
court shall give the offender credit for all confinement time served before the
sentencing if that confinement was solely in regard to the offense for which
the offender is being sentenced.

(7) The court shall order
restitution as provided in RCW 9.94A.140 and 9.94A.142.

(8) As a part of any
sentence, the court may impose and enforce crime-related prohibitions and
affirmative conditions as provided in this chapter.

(9) The court may order
an offender whose sentence includes community placement or community
supervision to undergo a mental status evaluation and to participate in
available outpatient mental health treatment, if the court finds that
reasonable grounds exist to believe that the offender is a mentally ill person
as defined in RCW 71.24.025, and that this condition is likely to have
influenced the offense. An order requiring mental status evaluation or
treatment must be based on a presentence report and, if applicable, mental
status evaluations that have been filed with the court to determine the
offender's competency or eligibility for a defense of insanity. The court may
order additional evaluations at a later date if deemed appropriate.

(10) In any sentence of
partial confinement, the court may require the offender to serve the partial
confinement in work release, in a program of home detention, on work crew, or
in a combined program of work crew and home detention.

(11) In
sentencing an offender convicted of a crime of domestic violence, as defined in
RCW 10.99.020, if the offender has a minor child, or if the victim of the
offense for which the offender was convicted has a minor child, the court may,
as part of any term of community supervision, community placement, or community
custody, order the offender to participate in a domestic violence perpetrator
program approved under RCW 26.50.150.

---
END ---