BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF
WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec.
1. The legislature
recognizes that under current state law, animal massage therapists and animal
massage practitioners cannot operate independently of licensed veterinarians.
The legislature further recognizes that massage therapists and physical
therapists practicing on people have the legal authority to operate
independently of licensed physicians and these massage and physical therapists
have contributed significantly to our welfare. Therefore, it is the
legislature's intent to give licensed animal massage therapists and animal
massage practitioners, who have specialized in the massage of animals, the
analogous privilege of operating independently of licensed veterinarians.
However, the legislature recognizes the need for animal massage therapists to
be supervised by an animal massage practitioner or indirectly by a licensed
veterinarian. Furthermore, it is the legislature's intent to have the
Washington state board of massage adopt rules under their current authority
necessary to implement this act. These rules would include educational and
examination requirements targeted towards individuals intending to specialize
in the massage of animals.

Sec. 2. RCW 18.92.060 and 2000 c
93 s 11 are each amended to read as follows:

Nothing in this chapter
applies to:

(1) Commissioned
veterinarians in the United States military services or veterinarians employed by
Washington state and federal agencies while performing official duties;

(2) A person practicing
veterinary medicine upon his or her own animal;

(3) A person advising
with respect to or performing the castrating and dehorning of cattle,
castrating and docking of sheep, castrating of swine, caponizing of poultry, or
artificial insemination of animals;

(4)(a) A person who is
a regularly enrolled student in a veterinary school or training course approved
under RCW 18.92.015 and performing duties or actions assigned by his or her
instructors or working under the direct supervision of a licensed veterinarian
during a school vacation period or (b) a person performing assigned duties
under the supervision of a veterinarian within the established framework of an
internship program recognized by the board;

(5) A veterinarian
regularly licensed in another state consulting with a licensed veterinarian in
this state;

(6) A veterinary
technician or veterinary medication clerk acting under the supervision and
control of a licensed veterinarian. The practice of a veterinary technician or
veterinary medication clerk is limited to the performance of services which are
authorized by the board;

(7) An owner being
assisted in practice by his or her employees when employed in the conduct of
the owner's business;

(8) An owner being
assisted in practice by some other person gratuitously;

(9) The implanting in
their own animals of any electronic device for identifying animals by
established humane societies and animal control organizations that provide
appropriate training, as determined by the veterinary board of governors,
and/or direct or indirect supervision by a licensed veterinarian;

(10) The implanting of
any electronic device by a public fish and wildlife agency for the
identification of fish or wildlife;

(11) A licensed
animal massage practitioner as defined in RCW 18.108.010.

Sec. 3. RCW 18.108.010 and 1997
c 297 s 2 are each amended to read as follows:

In this chapter, unless
the context otherwise requires, the following meanings shall apply:

(1) "Board"
means the Washington state board of massage.

(2) "Massage"
and "massage therapy" mean a health care service involving the
external manipulation or pressure of soft tissue for therapeutic purposes.
Massage therapy includes techniques such as tapping, compressions, friction,
Swedish gymnastics or movements, gliding, kneading, shaking, and facial or
connective tissue stretching, with or without the aids of superficial heat,
cold, water, lubricants, or salts. Massage therapy does not include diagnosis
or attempts to adjust or manipulate any articulations of the body or spine or
mobilization of these articulations by the use of a thrusting force, nor does it
include genital manipulation.

(3) "Massage
practitioner" means an individual licensed under this chapter, other
than an animal massage therapist or an animal massage practitioner.

(4)
"Secretary" means the secretary of health or the secretary's designee.

(5) "Massage
business" means the operation of a business where massages are
given.

(6) "Animal
massage therapist" means an individual with a minimum of one hundred hours
training in animal massage for the species of their choice, including massage
technique, kinesiology, anatomy and physiology, first aid care, and proper
handling techniques. An animal massage therapist is required to work under the
indirect supervision of a licensed veterinarian or a comparable nonveterinarian
animal health care professional, including animal massage practitioners.

(7) "Animal
massage practitioner" means an individual with a license to practice
massage therapy in this state, or a certified or licensed physical therapist or
physical therapist assistant. An animal massage practitioner must complete one
hundred hours of training in animal massage as set forth for animal massage
therapists under subsection (6) of this section. An animal massage
practitioner is a nonveterinarian animal health care professional and is authorized
to work independent of referral or supervision and may act as a mentor or
referral partner for an animal massage therapist.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 4. The secretary of health
shall adopt rules as necessary to implement this act.

---
END ---