BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF
WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec.
1. The legislature finds
that:

(1) Commercial egg
production is a source of food and laying hens must be kept in conditions that
promote public health;

(2) The confinement of
laying hens in battery cages is unnecessarily cruel and promotes the production
of contaminated eggs;

(3) The deliberate
withholding of food and water to laying hens for the purpose of increasing or
extending egg production is unnecessarily cruel; and

(4) Chickens are
sentient creatures such that we have an obligation to ensure that they are not
confined or treated in a manner that produces unnecessary suffering.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
2. The definitions in this
section apply throughout this chapter unless the context clearly requires
otherwise.

(1) "Battery
cage" means a cage used for the confinement of laying hens.

(2)
"Debeaking" means to remove the beak, or portion thereof, of the
laying hen.

(3) "Forced
molting" means the deliberate withholding of food or water to a laying hen
for the purpose of increasing or extending egg production.

(4) "Laying
hen" means a live female chicken kept for commercial egg production.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
3. (1) A person may not
confine laying hens in battery cages.

(2) A person may not
subject a laying hen to forced molting.

(3) A person may not
remove the beak, or any portion thereof, of a laying hen.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
4. A person may not confine
a laying hen without providing the laying hen, on a daily basis, access to
natural light and the opportunity to engage in natural behaviors including, but
not limited to, walking, perching, dirt scratching, stretching wings, and dust
bathing.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
5. A person who knowingly
violates section 3 (1), (2), or (3) of this act is guilty of a misdemeanor.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
6. (1) Any person or entity
who believes that any person or entity has or is violating this chapter may
seek injunctive relief to prevent any continued violation.

(2) The prevailing
party in an action for injunctive relief under this section is entitled to
recover reasonable costs and reasonable attorneys' fees.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
7. This chapter applies to
commercial egg production and operations that are required to be licensed under
chapter 69.25 RCW.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
8. Sections 1 through 7 of
this act constitute a new chapter in Title 16 RCW.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 9. This act takes effect
January 1, 2005.

---
END ---