BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF
WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec.
1. (1) The insurance
commissioner shall establish the task force on third-party administrator
regulation. The task force shall consist of thirteen members. The co-speakers
of the house of representatives shall select two members from the house of
representatives, one from each political caucus, and the president of the
senate shall select two members from the senate, one from each political caucus.
The commissioner shall select two members representing health carriers, one
member representing third-party administrators with a contractual relationship
with a health carrier, one member representing health care purchasers, two
members representing licensed health care providers, two members representing
consumers, and one representative of the office of insurance commissioner, who
shall act in an ex officio capacity.

(2) The task force
shall review the need for regulation of third-party administrators, including:

(a) Network adequacy
and disclosure of network adequacy standards;

(b) Provider
application and credentialing processes;

(c) The consistency of
third-party administrator standards and benefit packages sold by health
carriers, including utilization guidelines;

(d) The revocation of
prior authorization;

(e) The receipt of
provider claims; and

(f) The classes of
third-party administrators that should be subject to state regulation.

(3) The task force
shall report its findings and recommendations to the legislature no later than
December 15, 2001. In conducting its work, the task force shall monitor the
development of the national association of insurance commissioners proposal to
develop a model state statute on the regulation of third-party administrators,
and incorporate appropriate elements of the model statute in its recommendation
to the legislature.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 2. This act is necessary for
the immediate preservation of the public peace, health, or safety, or support
of the state government and its existing public institutions, and takes effect
immediately.

---
END ---