BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF
WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec.
1. A new section is added
to chapter 18.130 RCW to read as follows:

(1) Any health care
practitioner listed under RCW 18.130.040, including personnel of a hospital,
clinic, or other health care facility who knowingly treats any person suffering
from a gunshot wound, or who receives a request for such treatment, shall
report within a reasonable time the existence of the gunshot wound to an
appropriate law enforcement agency. However, no report is necessary if a law
enforcement officer is present with the victim while treatment is being
administered. The report may be made orally or otherwise.

(2) A hospital, clinic,
or other health care facility may designate an individual to make the report.
The report shall be made as soon as possible, but no later than the time of the
victim's release from the facility.

(3) A person required
to make a report or who participates in judicial proceedings resulting from the
report, acting in good faith, is immune from any civil liability which might
otherwise result from these actions. In all such civil proceedings, good faith
shall be a rebuttable presumption.

(4) The
confidential or privileged nature of the communication between the health care
practitioner and the person being treated as a patient pursuant to chapter
70.02 RCW is abrogated to the extent of this reporting and does not constitute
grounds for failure to report or for the exclusion of evidence resulting from a
report made under this section.

--- END ---