BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF
WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec.
1. A new section is added
to chapter 41.05 RCW to read as follows:

(1) The department of
health, the authority, the department of social and health services, the office
of the insurance commissioner, and the department of labor and industries must
form an interagency group for coordination and consultation on standardized
health care transaction forms for all state purchased health care.

(2) The interagency
group must include representatives of health carriers licensed under Title 48
RCW, health professionals licensed under Title 18 RCW, and employer purchasers
of health care.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
2. A new section is added
to chapter 41.05 RCW to read as follows:

(1) The interagency
group for coordination and consultation on standardized health care transaction
forms created under section 1 of this act must establish standardized health
care transaction forms for all transactions involving state purchased health
care, as defined in RCW 41.05.011. In developing transaction forms, the
interagency group must minimize provider burden and administrative cost
resulting from varying data submission requirements.

(2) The standardized
health care transaction forms must be consistent with all federal requirements
of the health insurance portability and accountability act of 1996, and
include:

(a) Claims;

(b) Enrollment;

(c) Eligibility;

(d) Payment and
remittance;

(e) Premium payment;

(f) Claim status;

(g) Referral and
authorization; and

(h) Coordination of
benefits.

(3) The standardized
health care transaction forms must be operational and in use no later than
October 1, 2002.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
3. If any provision of this
act or its application to any person or circumstance is held invalid, the
remainder of the act or the application of the provision to other persons or
circumstances is not affected.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 4. This act is necessary for
the immediate preservation of the public peace, health, or safety, or support
of the state government and its existing public institutions, and takes effect
immediately.

---
END ---