BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF
WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec.
1. After a proposed
initiative measure to the people or a proposed initiative measure to the
legislature is filed with the secretary of state, but not less than ninety days
before the election at which the proposed measure will appear on the ballot,
the secretary of state may request an opinion as to the constitutionality of
the proposed measure, by transmitting the request in writing to the attorney
general. Upon receipt of such a request, the attorney general shall transmit
it in writing to the ballot measure review committee created in section 2 of
this act without expressing an opinion on the merits of the question presented.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
2. The ballot measure review
committee is created, to be appointed by the attorney general, and consisting
of three regular members and not more than two alternate members. Each regular
and alternate member must meet at least one of the following qualifications:
(1) Prior service as a justice of the supreme court, a judge of the court of
appeals, or a judge of the superior court; (2) current or recent service as a
professor or teacher of constitutional law at an accredited law school; or (3)
admission to practice in the courts of this state for at least ten years, with
demonstrated experience analyzing constitutional law issues. The committee is
a class three group for purposes of member compensation and expense
reimbursement under chapter 43.03 RCW. Expenses and compensation for committee
members will be paid through the attorney general's office.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
3. (1) When the attorney
general transmits to the ballot measure review committee a request for an
opinion concerning the constitutionality of a proposed initiative measure, the
three regular members of the committee will constitute a review committee to
research and prepare a response to the request. If one or more regular members
is unable to serve, or is disqualified from reviewing a particular measure, one
or more alternate members may serve instead. A member is disqualified if he or
she: (a) Has a substantial, personal economic interest in the enactment or
rejection of a measure; (b) has participated, or is currently participating, as
an advocate for or against a measure on its merits, either directly or as an
attorney; or (c) has participated, or is currently participating as an advocate
for or against a similar ballot measure or similar legislation introduced in
the legislature, either directly or as an attorney. The review committee shall
conduct such research and inquiries as it deems appropriate, may solicit and
consider briefs or arguments submitted on the questions presented, may conduct
one or more public hearings to collect information to assist in the preparation
of an answer, and may meet from time to time to deliberate in preparing its
conclusions. The attorney general's office shall not take any position on the
questions before the committee, but may provide the committee with background
information at the committee's request.

(2) In responding to a
request, the committee may consider whether a measure is, on its face,
consistent with the Constitution of the state of Washington and with the
Constitution, laws, and treaties of the United States, taking into account the
case precedents and other materials available. The committee is not required
to comment on constitutional issues that are not apparent on the face of the
measure, or that would arise only in unusual circumstances, or that would
affect only a small category of potential applications of the measure.

(3) When a proposed
measure is the subject of an opinion request made under section 1 of this act,
the committee shall prepare a written report in response to the request, to be
transmitted to the secretary of state not less than sixty days before the
proposed measure will appear on the ballot. The report must include a summary
containing not more than one hundred words. If a majority of the committee
reviewing a measure has reached a firm conclusion that the proposed measure, or
some substantial portion of it, would be held unconstitutional if enacted, the
report must be headed with a summary so stating. Otherwise, the committee may
summarize its findings in another appropriate manner, such as by stating that
the committee believes the proposed measure would withstand constitutional
challenge, or that the committee could not reach a firm conclusion as to the
constitutionality of the proposed measure. In addition to the summary, the
committee may include in the report such additional analysis as it deems
appropriate. The committee's report must be signed by those who prepared it,
and may include concurring and dissenting remarks by members of the review
committee.

(4) Each report
prepared under this section must be transmitted immediately to the secretary of
state and to the attorney general. The report and its conclusions constitute
the opinion of the committee, and not the opinion of the attorney general, on
the questions presented.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
4. The deliberations of the
ballot measure review committee conducted under section 3 of this act are
exempt from the Open Public Meetings Act, chapter 42.30 RCW.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
5. If the ballot measure
review committee has provided a report on a proposed ballot measure under
section 3 of this act, and if the measure qualifies for placement on the
ballot, the secretary of state shall publish the summary of the report in the
voters' pamphlet prepared for the election at which the people will vote on the
proposed measure. The summary must appear immediately below or adjacent to the
explanatory statement on the measure, but must not be a part of the explanatory
statement. The summary must be accompanied by the statement: "This
summary was prepared by the state Ballot Measure Review Committee and does not
represent the finding of a court or the opinion of the attorney general."

NEW SECTION. Sec.
6. (1) If the ballot measure
review committee publishes a report in which a majority of the committee finds
that a proposed initiative measure would likely be held unconstitutional, a
person dissatisfied with the report may seek direct review in the state supreme
court by petition filed within five days, excluding Saturdays, Sundays, and
legal holidays, after the report is transmitted to the secretary of state. A
copy of the petition must be served on the secretary of state. If the
petitioner is some person other than the sponsor of the proposed initiative, a
copy of the petition must also be served on the sponsor.

(2) The supreme court
shall forthwith consider whether the report compared by the committee is fair
and reasonable in light of applicable existing law. After conducting such
proceedings as it may deem appropriate, the court may (a) dismiss the petition,
(b) grant the petition and enjoin the inclusion of the summary of the report in
the voters' pamphlet, or (c) direct that the summary be modified as directed by
the court. The supreme court's review of a report and resulting decision may
not be construed or cited in other cases as a decision on the constitutionality
of the proposed initiative measure, nor does the conduct of judicial review under
this section preclude any court from subsequently considering the
constitutionality of the same or a similar measure in a case or controversy
arising after the enactment of the legislation.

(3) Except as set forth
in this section, the reports of the ballot measure review committee are not
subject to judicial review.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
7. Sections 1 through 6 of
this act are not intended to provide a person with a basis for seeking to have
a proposed ballot measure excluded from the ballot based on an argument that
such a measure would, if enacted, be unconstitutional.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
8. The attorney general may
adopt rules to implement sections 1 through 7 of this act.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 9. Sections 1 through 8 of
this act are added to chapter 29.79 RCW.

---
END ---