BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF
WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec.
1. The legislature
recognizes that vulnerable adults, while living in their own homes, may be
abused, neglected, financially exploited, or abandoned by individuals entrusted
to provide care for them. The individuals who abuse, neglect, financially
exploit, or abandon vulnerable adults may be employed by, under contract with,
or volunteering for an agency or program providing care for vulnerable adults.
The legislature has given the department of social and health services the
responsibility to investigate complaints of abandonment, abuse, financial
exploitation, or neglect of vulnerable adults and to provide protective
services and other legal remedies to protect these vulnerable adults. The
legislature finds that in order to continue to protect vulnerable adults, the
department of social and health services be given the authority to release
report information and to release the results of an investigation to the agency
or program with which the individual investigated is employed, contracted, or
engaged as a volunteer.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
2. A new section is added
to chapter 74.34 RCW to read as follows:

(1) Before the
investigation is complete, if the department determines that the vulnerable
adult is at risk of further abuse, neglect, financial exploitation, or
abandonment, or other vulnerable adults are at risk, the department may provide
to an agency or program described in this subsection the substance of a report
alleging abuse, abandonment, financial exploitation, or neglect of a vulnerable
adult by an individual employed by, under contract with, or volunteering for
such agency or program. Agencies or programs that may be provided this report
are home health, hospice, or home care agencies licensed under chapter 70.127
RCW, a program authorized under chapter 71A.12 RCW, an adult day care or day
health programs, or other agencies, not including facilities. The report
provided to the agency or program may contain the name of the vulnerable adult
and the alleged perpetrator of the abuse, abandonment, financial exploitation,
or neglect. The report shall not disclose the identity of the person who made
the report or any witness without written permission of the reporter or
witness.

(2) After the
investigation is complete, the department may provide a written report of the
outcome of the investigation to the agency or program referenced in subsection
(1) of this section when a report was made under subsection (1) of this section
or when the department determines from its investigation that an incident of
abuse, abandonment, financial exploitation, or neglect occurred. The report
may contain the name of the vulnerable adult and the alleged perpetrator. The
report shall not disclose the identity of the person who made the report or any
witness without the written permission of the reporter or witness.

(3) The department may
also refer a report or outcome of an investigation to appropriate state or
local governmental authorities responsible for licensing or certification of
the agencies or programs listed in subsection (1) of this section.

(4) The
department shall adopt rules necessary to implement this section.

---
END ---