BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF
WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1. RCW 28A.150.260 and 1997
c 13 s 2 are each amended to read as follows:

The basic education
allocation for each annual average full time equivalent student shall be
determined in accordance with the following procedures:

(1) The governor shall
and the superintendent of public instruction may recommend to the legislature a
formula based on a ratio of students to staff for the distribution of a basic
education allocation for each annual average full time equivalent student
enrolled in a common school. The distribution formula shall have the primary
objective of equalizing educational opportunities and shall provide appropriate
recognition of the following costs among the various districts within the
state:

(a) Certificated
instructional staff and their related costs;

(b) Certificated
administrative staff and their related costs;

(c) Classified staff
and their related costs;

(d) Nonsalary costs,
including those costs associated with administrative technology;

(e) Extraordinary costs
of remote and necessary schools and small high schools, including costs of
additional certificated and classified staff; ((and))

(f) The costs of
educational technology as part of the instructional program; and

(g) The
attendance of students pursuant to RCW 28A.335.160 and 28A.225.250 who do not
reside within the servicing school district.

(2)(a) This formula for
distribution of basic education funds shall be reviewed biennially by the
superintendent and governor. The recommended formula shall be subject to
approval, amendment or rejection by the legislature. The formula shall be for
allocation purposes only with the exception of those funds distributed for
educational technology. The funding formula adopted by the legislature shall
not mandate the nature or type of educational technology purchased by school
districts, but the funds shall be used solely for this purpose. While the
legislature intends that the allocations for additional instructional staff be
used to increase the ratio of such staff to students, nothing in this section
shall require districts to reduce the number of administrative staff below
existing levels.

(b) The formula adopted
by the legislature shall reflect the following ratios at a minimum: (i)
Forty-nine certificated instructional staff to one thousand annual average full
time equivalent students enrolled in grades kindergarten through three; (ii)
forty-six certificated instructional staff to one thousand annual average full
time equivalent students in grades four through twelve; (iii) four certificated
administrative staff to one thousand annual average full time equivalent
students in grades kindergarten through twelve; and (iv) sixteen and
sixty-seven one-hundredths classified personnel to one thousand annual average
full time equivalent students enrolled in grades kindergarten through twelve.

(c) In the event the
legislature rejects the distribution formula recommended by the governor,
without adopting a new distribution formula, the distribution formula for the
previous school year shall remain in effect: PROVIDED, That the distribution
formula developed pursuant to this section shall be for state apportionment and
equalization purposes only and shall not be construed as mandating specific
operational functions of local school districts other than those program requirements
identified in RCW 28A.150.220 and 28A.150.100. The enrollment of any district
shall be the annual average number of full time equivalent students and part
time students as provided in RCW 28A.150.350, enrolled on the first school day
of each month and shall exclude full time equivalent students with disabilities
recognized for the purposes of allocation of state funds for programs under RCW
28A.155.010 through 28A.155.100. The definition of full time equivalent
student shall be determined by rules of the superintendent of public
instruction: PROVIDED, That the definition shall be included as part of the
superintendent's biennial budget request: PROVIDED, FURTHER, That any revision
of the present definition shall not take effect until approved by the house
appropriations committee and the senate ways and means committee: PROVIDED,
FURTHER, That the office of financial management shall make a monthly review of
the superintendent's reported full time equivalent students in the common
schools in conjunction with RCW 43.62.050.

(3)(a) Certificated
instructional staff shall include those persons employed by a school district
who are nonsupervisory employees within the meaning of RCW 41.59.020(8):
PROVIDED, That in exceptional cases, people of unusual competence but without
certification may teach students so long as a certificated person exercises
general supervision: PROVIDED, FURTHER, That the hiring of such classified
people shall not occur during a labor dispute and such classified people shall
not be hired to replace certificated employees during a labor dispute.

(b)
Certificated administrative staff shall include all those persons who are chief
executive officers, chief administrative officers, confidential employees,
supervisors, principals, or assistant principals within the meaning of RCW
41.59.020(4).

--- END ---