BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF
WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec.
1. A new section is added
to chapter 41.05 RCW to read as follows:

(1) The board shall
offer a plan of health insurance to blind licensees who are actively operating
facilities and participating in the business enterprises program established in
RCW 74.18.200 through 74.18.230, and maintained by the department of services
for the blind. The plan of health insurance benefits must be the same or substantially
similar to the plan of health insurance benefits offered to state employees
under this chapter. Enrollment will be at the option of each individual
licensee or vendor, under rules established by the board.

(2) All costs incurred
by the state or the board for providing health insurance coverage to active
blind vendors, excluding family participation, under subsection (1) of this
section may be paid for from net proceeds from vending machine operations in
public buildings under RCW 74.18.230.

(3) Money from the
business enterprises program under the federal Randolph-Sheppard Act may not be
used for family participation in the health insurance benefits provided under
this section. Family insurance benefits are the sole responsibility of the individual
blind vendors.

Sec. 2. RCW 74.18.230 and 1993 c
369 s 1 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) There is
established in the state treasury an account known as the business enterprises
revolving account.

(2) The net proceeds
from any vending machine operation in a public building, other than an
operation managed by a licensee, shall be made payable to the business
enterprises ((revolving fund)) program, which will pay only the blind
vendors' portion, at the subscriber's rate, for the purpose of funding a plan
of health insurance for blind vendors, as provided in section 1 of this act.
Net proceeds, for purposes of this section, means the gross amount received
less the costs of the operation, including a fair minimum return to the vending
machine owner, which return shall not exceed a reasonable amount to be
determined by the department.

(3) All federal moneys
in the business enterprises revolving account shall be expended only for
development and expansion of locations, equipment, management services, and
payments to licensees in the business enterprises program.

(4) The
business enterprises program shall be supported by the business enterprises
revolving account and by income which may accrue to the department pursuant to
the federal Randolph-Sheppard Act.

---
END ---