BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF
WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec.
1. The legislature finds
that the state of Washington has made significant progress towards decreasing
the number of persons in the state without health insurance coverage. However,
despite these efforts, a substantial number of persons in Washington state
remain uninsured. The legislature further finds that efforts are currently
underway in local areas to identify and implement innovative approaches to
increasing access to health coverage and health services for low-income
families and people with disabilities or chronic health conditions. Some of
these innovative approaches require flexibility on the part of the state in its
health care purchasing, administration of eligibility determination and
enrollment processes, or regulatory activities. The legislature intends to
further local efforts by initiating an implementation planning process, and
giving the department of social and health services, the health care authority,
and the office of the insurance commissioner authority to waive certain
statutory requirements needed to grant applications for regional health care
access demonstration projects.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
2. (1) The health care
authority shall establish a regional health care access demonstration project
workgroup whose membership includes:

(a) The department of social
and health services medical assistance administration;

(b) The office of the
insurance commissioner;

(c) The department of
health;

(d) The health care
authority;

(e) The office of the
governor;

(f) Representatives of
regional health care access organizations who have received grant funding from
either the Robert Wood Johnson foundation or the federal health resources and
services administration for local health care system redesign and access
initiatives;

(g) The Washington
health foundation; and

(h) The University of
Washington health policy analysis program.

(2) The workgroup must
develop a plan to implement section 3 of this act. The implementation plan
shall be submitted to appropriate committees of the legislature and the
governor by December 15, 2001.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
3. (1) The administrator
must act as the lead agency for the purposes of receipt and review of grant
applications for regional health care access demonstration projects under the
terms and conditions set forth in sections 3 through 6 of this act. The review
panel must include representatives of the health care authority, the department
of social and health services, the department of health, and the office of the
insurance commissioner.

(2) The administrator,
with the consent of other affected state agencies, may grant regional health
care access demonstration project applications in up to four sites around the
state. To the extent necessary to implement a demonstration project, affected
state agencies may exercise the authority granted in sections 4 through 6 of
this act. The demonstration sites chosen must be representative of urban and
rural communities in eastern and western Washington. The demonstration
projects may have a duration of up to five years.

(3) Any application for
a regional health care access demonstration project under this section must:

(a) Be designed to
improve access to health care for uninsured low-income families and people with
disabilities or chronic illness who live in the region included in the
demonstration project;

(b) Not make
modifications in medical assistance programs or the basic health plan that have
the effect of disadvantaging, as a group, low-income families and people with
disabilities or chronic illness who live in the region included in the
demonstration project;

(c) Identify at least
one goal of improved population-based health status that will result from the
demonstration project's efforts;

(d) Include proposed
steps to reduce duplication and simplify administration of medical assistance
programs and the basic health plan;

(e) Coordinate
eligibility, enrollment, and service delivery across medical assistance, the
basic health plan, and other programs serving low-income families and people
with disabilities or chronic illness who live in the region included in the
demonstration project;

(f) Ensure the
availability of an adequate number and type of health care providers in any
provider network sponsored by or through the demonstration project; and

(g) Include a rigorous
evaluation component. The evaluation must be designed to measure:

(i) The per capita
health care expenditures for the populations targeted for coverage under the
demonstration project;

(ii) The impact of the
demonstration project upon the targeted population, measured in terms of health
insurance coverage, either public or private, access to health services, and
health status;

(iii) The impact of the
demonstration project upon charity care expenses for hospitals in the region
participating in the demonstration project;

(iv) The level of
community and consumer input in the design and implementation of the
demonstration project; and

(v) The adequacy of any
health care provider network sponsored by or through the demonstration project.

(4) An entity
submitting an application for a regional health care access demonstration
project must:

(a) Demonstrate the
capacity to undertake the demonstration project described in the application;

(b) Identify monetary
and in-kind resources that will be brought to bear in support of the
demonstration project, and the source of those resources;

(c) Demonstrate broad
participation and support from the communities included in the region to be
covered by the demonstration project. The participation should include support
from health care providers, social services providers, employers, carriers,
local public health departments or districts, city or county councils or
commissions, and consumers;

(d) Identify the means
through which the demonstration project will be accountable to the communities
included in the region. Accountability may be achieved through, but would not
be limited to: The lead agency of the demonstration project having a publicly
elected board, such as a hospital district, or a board composed of elected
officials, such as a local public health district; establishment of a project
steering committee that is broadly representative of the communities included
in the region; or processes for obtaining public input as to the demonstration
project's design and implementation on a regular basis.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
4. In conjunction with
granting an application for a regional health care access demonstration project
under section 3 of this act, the administrator may modify the requirements of
RCW 70.47.060 (7) and (11) and 70.47.100 relating to basic health plan
contracting. In determining the extent to which modifications to statutory
requirements are appropriate under this section, the administrator shall
consider:

(1) The extent to which
the modifications to statutory requirements are necessary to carry out the
regional health care access demonstration project;

(2) The need to ensure
that an adequate network of health care providers is available to meet the
needs of consumers served by the demonstration project; and

(3) The need to ensure
that consumers served by the demonstration projects are adequately protected in
the event of financial failure or difficulties of any entity participating in
the demonstration project.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
5. A new section is added
to chapter 74.09 RCW to read as follows:

In conjunction with
granting an application for a regional health care access demonstration project
under section 3 of this act, the department may modify the requirements of RCW
74.09.522 relating to medicaid managed care contracting. In determining the
extent to which modifications to statutory requirements are appropriate under this
section, the department shall consider:

(1) The extent to which
the modifications to statutory requirements are necessary to carry out the
regional health care access demonstration project;

(2) The need to ensure
that an adequate network of health care providers is available to meet the
needs of consumers served by the demonstration project; and

(3) The need to ensure
that consumers served by the demonstration projects are adequately protected in
the event of financial failure or difficulties of any entity participating in
the demonstration project.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
6. A new section is added
to chapter 48.43 RCW to read as follows:

In conjunction with
granting an application for a regional health care access demonstration project
under section 3 of this act, the commissioner may modify the requirements of
this title relating to rates, forms, and solvency. In determining the extent to
which modifications to statutory requirements are appropriate under this
section, the commissioner shall consider:

(1) The extent to which
the modifications to statutory requirements are necessary to carry out the
regional health care access demonstration project and will comply with the
intent of this title to protect consumers of health services in the state of
Washington;

(2) The need to ensure
that an adequate network of health care providers is available to meet the
needs of consumers served by the demonstration project; and

(3) The need to ensure
that consumers served by the demonstration projects are adequately protected in
the event of financial failure or difficulties of any entity participating in
the demonstration project.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 7. Sections 1, 3, and 4 of
this act are each added to chapter 41.05 RCW.

---
END ---