BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF
WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec.
1. The legislature finds
that, as a partner in financing public higher education, it is important to
provide predictable state support, financial aid, and affordable tuition rates
for students. To achieve permanent, predictable, and affordable tuition rates,
the legislature intends that the maximum annual changes in tuition be based on
the average per capita income in the state as predicted by the office of
economic and revenue forecast. This policy extends tuition setting authority
to institutions of higher education and the state board for community and
technical colleges, within the limits of the percentage increase in per capita
personal income as provided in RCW 28B.15.067(2), so they can respond to
individual priority needs not addressed by the legislature. This policy also
provides that state general fund support for higher education increase in
accordance with the forecast of the state's average per capita income. This
policy further provides for continued state general fund support of the state
need grant program.

Sec. 2. RCW 28B.15.067 and 1997
c 403 s 1 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) Tuition fees shall
be established under the provisions of this chapter.

(2) ((Academic year
tuition for full-time students at the state's institutions of higher education
for the 1997-98 academic year, other than the summer term, shall be as provided
in this subsection.

(a) At the
University of Washington and Washington State University:

(i) For resident
undergraduate students and other resident students not in graduate, law, or
first professional programs, two thousand nine hundred eighty-eight dollars;

(ii)(A) For
nonresident undergraduate students and other nonresident students at the
University of Washington not in graduate, law, or first professional programs,
ten thousand two hundred seventy-eight dollars;

(B) For nonresident
undergraduate students and other nonresident students at Washington State
University not in graduate or first professional programs, nine thousand eight
hundred seventy dollars;

(iii) For resident
graduate students, four thousand eight hundred fifty-four dollars;

(iv) For nonresident
graduate students, twelve thousand five hundred eighty-eight dollars;

(v) For resident law
students, five thousand ten dollars;

(vi) For nonresident
law students, twelve thousand nine hundred fifteen dollars;

(vii) For resident
first professional students, eight thousand one hundred twelve dollars; and

(viii) For
nonresident first professional students, twenty-one thousand twenty-four
dollars.

(b) At the regional
universities and The Evergreen State College:

(i) For resident
undergraduate and all other resident students not in graduate programs, two
thousand two hundred eleven dollars;

(ii) For nonresident
undergraduate and all other nonresident students not in graduate programs,
eight thousand six hundred forty-six dollars;

(iii) For resident
graduate students, three thousand seven hundred twenty-six dollars; and

(iv) For nonresident
graduate students, eleven thousand nine hundred seventy-six dollars.

(c) At the community
colleges:

(i) For resident
students, one thousand three hundred eleven dollars; and

(ii) For nonresident
students, five thousand five hundred eighty-six dollars.

(3) Academic year
tuition for full-time students at the state's institutions of higher education
beginning with the 1998-99 academic year, other than the summer term, shall be
as provided in this subsection unless different rates are adopted in the
omnibus appropriations act.

(a) At the
University of Washington and Washington State University:

(i) For resident
undergraduate students and other resident students not in graduate, law, or
first professional programs, three thousand one hundred eight dollars;

(ii)(A) For nonresident
undergraduate students and other nonresident students at the University of
Washington not in graduate, law, or first professional programs, eleven
thousand one hundred thirty dollars;

(B) For nonresident
undergraduate students and other nonresident students at Washington State
University not in graduate or first professional programs, ten thousand two
hundred sixty-six dollars;

(iii) For resident
graduate students, five thousand forty-six dollars;

(iv) For nonresident
graduate students, thirteen thousand ninety-two dollars;

(v) For resident law
students, five thousand three hundred seventy-six dollars;

(vi) For nonresident
law students, thirteen thousand seven hundred eighty-two dollars;

(vii) For resident
first professional students, eight thousand four hundred thirty-six dollars;
and

(viii) For
nonresident first professional students, twenty-one thousand eight hundred
sixty-four dollars.

(b) At the regional
universities and The Evergreen State College:

(i) For resident
undergraduate and all other resident students not in graduate programs, two
thousand two hundred ninety-eight dollars;

(ii) For nonresident
undergraduate and all other nonresident students not in graduate programs,
eight thousand nine hundred ninety-one dollars;

(iii) For resident
graduate students, three thousand eight hundred seventy-six dollars; and

(iv) For nonresident
graduate students, twelve thousand four hundred fifty-six dollars.

(c) At the community
colleges:

(i) For resident
students, one thousand three hundred sixty-two dollars; and

(ii) For nonresident
students, five thousand eight hundred eight dollars.

(4) For the 1997-98
and 1998-99 academic years, the University of Washington shall use at least ten
percent of the revenue received from the difference between a four percent
increase in tuition fees and the actual increase charged to law students to
assist needy low and middle-income resident law students. For the 1997-98 and
1998-99 academic years, the University of Washington shall use at least ten
percent of the revenue received from the difference between a four percent
increase in tuition fees and the actual increase charged to nonresident
undergraduate students and all other nonresident students not in graduate, law,
or first professional programs to assist needy low and middle-income resident
undergraduate students and all other resident students not enrolled in
graduate, law, or first professional programs. This requirement is in addition
to the deposit requirements of the institutional aid fund under RCW 28B.15.820.

(5))) Beginning with academic year 2001-02 and
each year thereafter, tuition fees may be adjusted by the governing boards of
the state universities, regional universities, The Evergreen State College, and
the state board for community and technical colleges as provided in this
section. Increases authorized under this subsection may be in excess of the
fiscal growth factor. The amount of increase may not exceed the percentage
increase in per capita income as determined by the higher education
coordinating board based on a continuous three-year rolling average.

(3) For academic
year 2001-02 and academic year 2002-03, each institution of higher education
may impose a surcharge of up to two percent beyond the per capita income level
calculated for that fiscal year. The surcharge shall not become part of the
tuition base for future calculation. Increases authorized under this
subsection may be in excess of the fiscal growth factor. Any moneys received
from surcharges collected at any institution of higher education shall be
deposited directly into their respective local accounts containing operating
fee revenue and related interest. This subsection does not apply after June
30, 2003.

(4) The governing
boards and the state board for community and technical colleges may adjust
full-time tuition fees or surcharge fees for factors that may include time of
day and day of week, as well as delivery method and campus, to encourage full
use of the state's educational facilities and resources. The tuition increases
adopted under subsection (2) of this section need not apply uniformly across
student categories as defined in this chapter so long as the tuition increase
for each student category does not exceed the increase in per capita personal
income as specified in this section. A surcharge adopted under subsection (3)
of this section need not apply uniformly across student categories as defined
in this chapter.

(5) As used in this
section, "surcharge" means that amount equal to up to two percent
beyond the per capita personal income calculation each year that may be imposed
locally by each governing board for four-year institutions of higher education
and by the state board for community and technical colleges for the community
and technical colleges as a whole.

(6) Students
receiving state need grants should not be deprived of access to higher
education due to increases in tuition rates. The legislature retains the
responsibility to appropriate funds to the state need grant program to support
changes in overall program eligibility, increased enrollments, and tuition
levels. The legislature shall continue to provide resources directly to the
state need grant program for changes in program eligibility, increases in
enrollments, and changes in tuition based on the per capita personal income
calculation.

(7) To ensure that
students receiving state need grants do not have the value of those grants
diminished as a result of governing boards' actions under subsection (3) of
this section, institutions of higher education shall provide from surcharge
revenue collected under subsection (3) of this section financial aid grants to
state need grant recipients in an amount that is equal to the amount of the
increase resulting from the surcharge imposed by the governing boards under
subsection (3) of this section. Institutions of higher education may not
reduce the proportion of state need grant recipients relative to the total
number of resident undergraduates in the prior year as determined by the higher
education coordinating board.

(8) Each institution
of higher education shall report to the higher education coordinating board on
the financial aid expended according to subsection (6) of this section in a
manner determined by the board.

(9) The tuition
fees established under this chapter shall not apply to high school students
enrolling in participating institutions of higher education under RCW
28A.600.300 through ((28A.600.395)) 28A.600.390.

Sec. 3. RCW 28B.15.031 and 1996
c 142 s 2 are each amended to read as follows:

The term
"operating fees" as used in this chapter shall include the fees,
other than building fees, charged all students registering at the state's
colleges and universities but shall not include fees for short courses,
self-supporting degree credit programs and courses, marine station work,
experimental station work, correspondence or extension courses, and individual
instruction and student deposits or rentals, disciplinary and library fines,
which colleges and universities shall have the right to impose, laboratory,
gymnasium, health, technology and student activity fees, or fees, charges,
rentals, and other income derived from any or all revenue producing lands, buildings
and facilities of the colleges or universities heretofore or hereafter
acquired, constructed or installed, including but not limited to income from
rooms, dormitories, dining rooms, hospitals, infirmaries, housing or student
activity buildings, vehicular parking facilities, land, or the appurtenances
thereon, or such other special fees as may be established by any college or
university board of trustees or regents from time to time. All moneys received
as operating fees at any institution of higher education shall be deposited in
a local account containing only operating fees revenue and related interest:
PROVIDED, That a minimum of three and one-half percent of operating fees shall
be retained by the institutions((, except the technical colleges,)) for
the purposes of RCW 28B.15.820. Local operating fee accounts shall not be
subject to appropriation by the legislature or allotment procedures under
chapter 43.88 RCW.

Sec. 4. RCW 28B.15.066 and 2000
c 152 s 2 are each amended to read as follows:

It is the intent of the
legislature that:

In making
appropriations from the state's general fund to institutions of higher
education, each appropriation shall conform to the following:

(1) The appropriation
shall not be reduced by the amount of operating fees revenue estimated to be
collected from students enrolled at the state-funded enrollment level specified
in the omnibus biennial operating appropriations act;

(2) The appropriation shall
not be reduced by the amount of operating fees revenue collected from students
enrolled above the state-funded level((, but within the over-enrollment
limitations,)) specified in the omnibus biennial operating appropriations
act; and

(3) The
general fund state appropriation shall not be reduced by the amount of
operating fees revenue collected as a result of waiving less operating fees
revenue than the amounts authorized under RCW 28B.15.910. State general fund
appropriations shall not be provided for revenue foregone as a result of or for
waivers granted under RCW 28B.15.915.

---
END ---