BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF
WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1. RCW 4.96.041 and 1993 c
449 s 4 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) Whenever an action
or proceeding for damages is brought against any past or present officer,
employee, or volunteer of a local governmental entity of this state, arising
from acts or omissions while performing or in good faith purporting to perform
his or her official duties, such officer, employee, or volunteer may request
the local governmental entity to authorize the defense of the action or
proceeding at the expense of the local governmental entity.

(2) If the legislative
authority of the local governmental entity, or the local governmental entity
using a procedure created by ordinance or resolution, finds that the acts or
omissions of the officer, employee, or volunteer were, or in good faith
purported to be, within the scope of his or her official duties, the request
shall be granted. If the request is granted, the necessary expenses of defending
the action or proceeding shall be paid by the local governmental entity. Any
monetary judgment against the officer, employee, or volunteer shall be paid on
approval of the legislative authority of the local governmental entity or by a
procedure for approval created by ordinance or resolution.

(3) The necessary
expenses of defending an elective officer of the local governmental entity in a
judicial hearing to determine the sufficiency of a recall charge as provided in
RCW 29.82.023 shall be paid by the local governmental entity if the officer
requests such defense and approval is granted by both the legislative authority
of the local governmental entity and the attorney representing the local
governmental entity. The expenses paid by the local governmental entity may
include costs associated with an appeal of the decision rendered by the
superior court concerning the sufficiency of the recall charge.

(4) When an officer,
employee, or volunteer of the local governmental entity other than a law
enforcement officer covered under subsection (5) of this section has been
represented at the expense of the local governmental entity under subsection
(1) of this section and the court hearing the action has found that the
officer, employee, or volunteer was acting within the scope of his or her
official duties, and a judgment has been entered against the officer, employee,
or volunteer under chapter 4.96 RCW or 42 U.S.C. Sec. 1981 et seq., thereafter
the judgment creditor shall seek satisfaction for nonpunitive damages only from
the local governmental entity, and judgment for nonpunitive damages shall not
become a lien upon any property of such officer, employee, or volunteer. The
legislative authority of a local governmental entity may, pursuant to a procedure
created by ordinance or resolution, agree to pay an award for punitive damages.

(5) When a law
enforcement officer makes a request for defense under subsection (1) of this
section, the determination under subsection (2) of this section as to whether
or not the acts or omissions of the law enforcement officer were, or in good
faith purported to be, within the scope of his or her official duties shall be
made within sixty days. If the request is granted, the necessary expenses of
defending the action or proceeding shall be paid by the local governmental
entity. When a law enforcement officer of the local governmental entity has
been represented at the expense of the local governmental entity under
subsection (1) of this section and the court hearing the action has found that
the law enforcement officer was acting within the scope of his or her official
duties, and a judgment has been entered against the law enforcement officer
under this chapter or 42 U.S.C. Sec. 1981 et seq., any monetary judgment against
the law enforcement officer shall be paid by the legislative authority of the
local governmental entity, and thereafter the judgment creditor shall seek
satisfaction for damages only from the local governmental entity, and judgment
for damages shall not become a lien upon any property of such law enforcement
officer.

For the
purposes of this section, "law enforcement officer" has the meaning
provided in RCW 9.41.010.

--- END ---