BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF
WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1. RCW 28A.160.180 and 1996
c 279 s 3 are each amended to read as follows:

Each district's annual
student transportation allocation shall be based on differential rates
determined by the superintendent of public instruction in the following manner:

(1) The superintendent
shall annually calculate a standard student mile allocation rate for
determining the transportation allocation for those services provided for in
RCW 28A.160.150. "Standard student mile allocation rate," as used in
this chapter, means the per mile allocation rate for transporting an eligible
student. The standard student mile allocation rate may be adjusted to include
such additional differential factors as distance; restricted passenger load;
circumstances that require use of special types of transportation vehicles;
student with disabilities load; and small fleet maintenance. In calculating
the allocation to each school district, the superintendent shall not include in
the calculation the number of nonfunded students in grades six through twelve
who are picked up within one mile of school.

(2) For transportation
services for students living within one radius mile from school, the allocation
shall be based on the number of students in grades kindergarten through five
living within one radius mile as specified in the biennial appropriations act.

(3) The superintendent
of public instruction shall annually calculate allocation rate(s), which shall
include vehicle amortization, for determining the transportation allocation for
transporting students in district-owned passenger cars, as defined in RCW
46.04.382, pursuant to RCW 28A.160.010 for services provided for in RCW
28A.160.150 if a school district deems it advisable to use such vehicles after
the school district board of directors has considered the safety of the
students being transported as well as the economy of utilizing a district-owned
passenger car in lieu of a school bus.

(4) Prior
to June 1st of each year the superintendent shall submit to the office of
financial management, and the committees on education and ways and means of the
senate and house of representatives a report outlining the methodology and
rationale used in determining the allocation rates to be used the following
year.

--- END ---