BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF
WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1. RCW 28A.150.390 and 1995
c 77 s 6 are each amended to read as follows:

The
superintendent of public instruction shall submit to each regular session of
the legislature during an odd-numbered year a programmed budget request for
special education programs for students with disabilities. Funding for
programs operated by local school districts shall be on an excess cost basis
from appropriations provided by the legislature for special education programs
for students with disabilities and shall take account of state funds accruing
through RCW 28A.150.250, 28A.150.260, federal medical assistance and private
funds accruing under RCW 74.09.5249 through 74.09.5253 and 74.09.5254 through
74.09.5256, and other state and local funds, excluding special excess levies. State
funding formulas for special education programs shall exclude from any special
education program enrollment funding caps students for whom districts do not
receive an allocation under RCW 28A.150.250 and 28A.150.260.

--- END ---