BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF
WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec.
1. A new section is added
to chapter 39.04 RCW to read as follows:

(1) Any agency or local
government may establish uniform standards and procedures to prequalify
competent and responsible contractors from which to award contracts for public
works, repair, or maintenance. A prequalification system may be used either to
limit the contractors that are afforded an opportunity to bid on a project or
to eliminate consideration of bids that are submitted from contractors that are
not prequalified. A prequalification system may be used in any procedure to
award contracts, including, but not limited to, contracts let without bids,
contracts let through a formal competitive bidding procedure with published bid
solicitations and sealed bids, contracts awarded using a design-build system of
letting contracts, contracts awarded through a contractor/construction manager
contracting system, or contracts let through a modified competitive bidding
system, such as a small works roster system.

(2) A prequalification
system may involve periodically soliciting contractors to be prequalified and
placed on a list or lists of prequalified contractors for different types of
work or prequalifying contractors for a specific project. Each contractor
desiring to be prequalified must complete a standard questionnaire form and
financial statement that includes questions about financial ability and work
experience, and is sworn to before a notary public or other person authorized
to take acknowledgment of deeds. To be prequalified, a contractor must have
all of the following requirements:

(a) Adequate financial
resources or the ability to secure such resources;

(b) The necessary
experience, organization, and technical qualifications to perform the proposed
contract;

(c) The ability to
comply with the required performance schedule taking into consideration all of
its existing business commitments;

(d) A satisfactory
record of performance, integrity, judgment, and skills; and

(e) Be otherwise
qualified and eligible to receive an award under applicable laws and
regulations.

The refusal of an
agency or local government to prequalify a contractor is conclusive unless the
agency or local government is ordered to give prequalification status to a
contractor by the superior court of Thurston county for agencies, or the
superior court of the county in which the local government is located for a
local government, where the appeal to the superior court is made within five
days of the decision not to prequalify the contractor, which appeal shall be
heard summarily within ten days after it is taken and on five days' notice
thereof to the agency or local government.

(3) For
purposes of this section, the term "municipality" means as it is
defined under RCW 39.04.010.

--- END ---