BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF
WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1. RCW 35.79.030 and 1987 c
228 s 1 are each amended to read as follows:

The
hearing on such petition may be held before the legislative authority, or
before a committee thereof upon the date fixed by resolution or at the time
said hearing may be adjourned to. If the hearing is before such a committee
the same shall, following the hearing, report its recommendation on the
petition to the legislative authority which may adopt or reject the
recommendation. If such hearing be held before such a committee it shall not
be necessary to hold a hearing on the petition before such legislative
authority. If the legislative authority determines to grant said petition or
any part thereof, such city or town shall be authorized and have authority by
ordinance to vacate such street, or alley, or any part thereof, and the
ordinance may provide that it shall not become effective until the owners of
property abutting upon the street or alley, or part thereof so vacated, shall
compensate such city or town in an amount which does not exceed ((one-half))
the appraised value of the area so vacated((, except in the event the
subject property or portions thereof were acquired at public expense,
compensation may be required in an amount equal to the full appraised value of
the vacation)): PROVIDED, That such ordinance may provide that the city
retain an easement or the right to exercise and grant easements in respect to
the vacated land for the construction, repair, and maintenance of public utilities
and services. A certified copy of such ordinance shall be recorded by the
clerk of the legislative authority and in the office of the auditor of the
county in which the vacated land is located.

--- END ---