BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF
WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec.
1. A new section is added
to chapter 74.09 RCW to read as follows:

(1) The department
shall establish a medication outreach program. The medication outreach program
shall:

(a) Identify and assist
eligible persons who are sixty-five years old and older in enrolling in the
state medical assistance program under this chapter; and

(b) Assist residents of
the state of Washington in obtaining free or low-cost prescription medications
or nonprescription medications from private and public sources that offer this
assistance. Medication outreach program assistance should include phone
numbers for sources of assistance, instructional material for completing
eligibility forms, and generally evaluating the possibility of an individual
obtaining assistance.

(2) As part of the
medication outreach program, the department must operate and maintain a
toll-free telephone number that will act as a clearinghouse for information
related to the purposes of the medication outreach program.

(3) When
establishing the portion of the medication outreach program dealing with
obtaining free or low-cost medication, the department must consult with a
statewide organization that represents physicians and a national organization
that represents pharmaceutical manufacturers that offer free or low-cost
medication assistance.

--- END ---