BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF
WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec.
1. The legislature finds
that the 2000 presidential election demonstrated the importance of ensuring the
highest possible level of technical skill and knowledge of federal and state
laws and administrative rules on the part of those conducting elections. It
further finds that, while the people who administer elections in Washington
have earned the confidence of the voters, even small errors can affect the
outcome of an election. It further finds that experience in other states such
as Florida has shown the importance of well-trained, tested, and certified
election administrators at all levels of the election process. The legislature
also finds that voting data on both a national and state level establishes the
need to update voting equipment to ensure that voters are not inadvertently
disenfranchised because of faulty or obsolete voting equipment or because those
persons charged with operating and maintaining the voting equipment are not
adequately trained or prepared for their duties. Additionally, the legislature
takes note of the United States Supreme Court decision in Bush v. Gore,
in which the court directed that standards be adopted to ensure that a standard
and uniform procedure is established for determining the validity of votes.
Therefore, the legislature directs that the certification and training program
established in the office of the secretary of state under chapter 29.60 RCW be
expanded to ensure that the mandate of the United States Supreme Court be
implemented, that election administrators in the state of Washington receive
expanded training and technical assistance to enable them to better fulfill
their statutory obligations, that the testing and certification of those
administrators continue, and that periodic reviews of county election
procedures, policies, and practices take place as often as deemed necessary by
the secretary of state but not less than once every three years in order to
ensure that the highest level of professionalism in the administration of
elections is maintained.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
2. The sum of four hundred
ninety thousand five hundred twenty-one dollars, or as much thereof as may be
necessary, is appropriated for the fiscal year ending June 30, 2002, from the
general fund to the secretary of state for the purposes of this act.

The sum of four hundred
seventy-four thousand three hundred fifty-six dollars, or as much thereof as
may be necessary, is appropriated for the fiscal year ending June 30, 2003,
from the general fund to the secretary of state for the purposes of this act.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 3. This act is necessary for
the immediate preservation of the public peace, health, or safety, or support
of the state government and its existing public institutions, and takes effect
immediately.

---
END ---