BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF
WASHINGTON:

_5 NEW SECTION. Sec. 1. The legislature
affirms that education has

_6 been and continues to be the underpinning of
Washington's economic

_7 and social fabric. The legislature further finds that
as

_8 Washington's population increasingly becomes more
diverse, it is

_9 essential that opportunities for education at all levels
be made

10 available to those who seek it.

11 NEW SECTION. Sec. 2. (1) The college
awareness project is

12 established to design and implement strategies to
encourage

13 participation of underserved populations in higher

14 education. Strategies shall include, but are not
limited to: (a)

15 Professional development for faculty, professional
staff, and

16 community support staff to collaboratively develop
support

17 structures necessary for success of diverse student
populations;

p. 1 HB
1755

_1 (b) early outreach to targeted populations in the
elementary,

_2 middle school, and high school grades to inform,
encourage, and

_3 prepare students to participate in and succeed in
completing their

_4 higher education goals; and (c) specific proposals for
public four-

_5 year institutions of higher education that enhance
recruitment,

_6 retention, and campus climate efforts necessary to
support

_7 participation by underserved students.

_8 (2) The college awareness project shall be a
collaborative

_9 effort among the council of presidents, the state board
for

10 community and technical colleges, the office of
superintendent of

11 public instruction, and the higher education
coordinating board.

12 NEW SECTION. Sec. 3. (1) Partners in the
college awareness

13 project shall develop a series of professional
development

14 academies for K-12 teachers, counselors, curriculum
specialists,

15 administrators, community service professionals, and
volunteers or

16 others who are committed to working with diverse
populations. These

17 academies will provide a collaborative framework for
working on

18 the complex issues of educating a diverse population,
including:

19 (a) Developing learning environments that more
effectively support

20 the successful preparation of traditionally underserved
students

21 for college; and (b) developing a local network of
community-based

22 resources to support and mentor K-12 students and staff.

23 (2) Academies shall be held at four college campus
sites around

24 Washington state during the academic year 2001-02 and
the summer

25 of 2002. Each academy shall focus on aspects of working
with a

26 culturally diverse student population and the various
resources

27 available from individuals, organizations, schools,
colleges, and

28 universities to support underserved students.

29 NEW SECTION. Sec. 4. (1) Partners in the
college awareness

30 project shall develop six regional partnerships among
the two-year

31 and four-year institutions of higher education and
school

32 districts with high proportions of underserved students
of color

33 to engage faculty, teachers, staff, students, and their
families

34 in programs aimed at bringing underrepresented students
to college

35 and university campuses to expose them to college life
and support

36 systems geared to their success.

HB 1755 p. 2

_1 (2) Partnerships shall focus on grades four through
six, middle

_2 school, and high school, and shall involve teachers,
counselors,

_3 students, parents, families, and community members in
programs

_4 throughout the state to promote college readiness.

_5 (3) Each partnership shall share results statewide
to inform

_6 best practices.

_7 NEW SECTION. Sec. 5. (1) The council of
presidents, the state

_8 board for community and technical colleges, the
superintendent of

_9 public instruction, and the higher education coordinating
board

10 shall establish a steering committee to oversee the
management and

11 implementation of sections 3 and 4 of the college
awareness

12 project. The steering committee shall: (a) Establish
policies,

13 procedures, and guidelines to carry out the goals of the
college

14 awareness project; (b) establish subcommittees from
their

15 respective memberships and constituencies, as
appropriate, to

16 implement the project; and (c) conduct or direct
appropriate

17 research to support the current effort as well as future
efforts.

18 (2) The college awareness project steering committee
shall

19 convene an advisory committee including, but not limited
to,

20 representatives from the public and private four-year
institutions

21 of higher education, the community and technical
colleges, K-12

22 schools and administrators, target population community
members,

23 and other groups that may support the goals of the
college

24 awareness project. The advisory committee shall provide
assistance

25 in implementing the goals of sections 3 and 4 of this
act, and may

26 enter into partnerships as appropriate to ensure success
of the

27 college awareness project.

28 (3) The college awareness project steering committee
shall

29 develop an evaluation plan for the college awareness
project

30 including specific and measurable objectives for the
project by

31 December 2001. The evaluation plan shall include both
process and

32 outcome measures for the college awareness project
described under

33 sections 3 and 4 of this act.

34 NEW SECTION. Sec. 6. (1) The evergreen
center for educational

35 improvement shall be the fiscal agent for funding
associated with

36 sections 2 through 4 of this act.

p. 3 HB
1755

_1 (2) The evergreen center for educational improvement
shall work

_2 with the college awareness project steering committee to
implement

_3 the project goals identified in sections 2 through 4 of
this act.

_4 NEW SECTION. Sec. 7. To the extent funds
are appropriated, the

_5 University of Washington shall:

_6 (1) Establish programs that send University of
Washington

_7 faculty, students, and staff to middle schools and high
schools in

_8 Washington state to: (a) Place or retain college
admission

_9 counselors in strategic Seattle and Tacoma area high
schools; (b)

10 hire part-time student ambassadors to coordinate student

11 involvement in outreach and recruitment efforts; (c)
hire a

12 student development coordinator to work in eastern
Washington;

13 expand the high school tutor and mentor programs; and
(d) provide

14 permanent funding for the pipeline project that
recruits, trains,

15 and supports undergraduate students as tutors and
mentors for

16 students;

17 (2) Establish programs that bring middle and high
school

18 students to the University of Washington campus, such as
(a)

19 expanded summer residential programs for middle and high
school

20 students; (b) permanent funding for Saturday academy;
and (c)

21 permanent funding for the summer science and computer
camp for

22 rural high school students;

23 (3) Establish programs that focus on enhancing
skills and

24 experiences needed for competitive college applications,
such as

25 (a) permanent funding for the ongoing operation and
expansion of

26 the early scholar's outreach program; (b) expansion of
the

27 mathematics, engineering and science achievement (MESA)
program;

28 and (c) implementation of a pilot SAT/ACT preparatory
program.

29 NEW SECTION. Sec. 8. To the extent funds
are appropriated,

30 Washington State University shall:

31 (1) Implement new initiatives to improve the campus
climate at

32 Washington State University that are identified by the
campus

33 climate survey that is currently under consideration by
the newly

34 convened council on student climate;

35 (2) In coordination with work currently funded by
the Hewlett

HB 1755 p. 4

_1 Foundation to establish a diversity course requirement,
implement

_2 new strategies such as freshmen interest groups and
learning

_3 communities that focus on diversity issues;

_4 (3) Establish new summer programs designed to orient
students

_5 to college life, engage them in serious academic work,
and develop

_6 skills and attitudes necessary for educational
advancement;

_7 (4) Expand opportunities for high school students in
the

_8 central part of the state to visit Washington State
University

_9 campuses to see first-hand educational opportunities offered
at

10 WSU Tri-Cities, Washington State University, Pullman,
and one of

11 Washington State University's feeder schools, Columbia
Basin

12 College;

13 (5) Expand programs that positively impact student
attitudes

14 toward higher education, such as, college knowledge for
the mind,

15 Cougar Mondays, and future Cougars of color, to serve
students in

16 areas not currently being served;

17 (6) Expand the number of community liaisons to
assist

18 Washington State University in providing more consistent
and

19 personal contact with prospective students and their
families;

20 (7) Increase tribal contacts to establish meaningful
outreach

21 programs that provide educational awareness
opportunities for

22 Native American children; and

23 (8) Establish programs that work directly with
middle and high

24 school students to help promote college awareness and
teach basic

25 skills needed for academic success.

26 NEW SECTION. Sec. 9. To the extent funds
are appropriated,

27 Central Washington University shall:

28 (1) Establish a program that focuses on providing
admissions

29 and teacher education information and course work to
eleventh and

30 twelfth grade underrepresented students from the Yakima
Valley,

31 Wenatchee Valley, and Columbia Basin areas interested in
careers

32 in education. The program is designed to increase
interest in

33 teacher education among students of color, assess
preparation and

34 readiness for college, and offer support services and
mentoring

35 for underrepresented students who may subsequently
enroll in

36 teacher preparation programs at Central Washington
University; and

37 (2) Establish a multicultural student center at
Central

p. 5 HB
1755

_1 Washington University to provide services and programs
that

_2 encourage multicultural students to succeed, and expand
cultural

_3 awareness and appreciation for cultural and racial
diversity

_4 within the university.

_5 NEW SECTION. Sec. 10. To the extent funds
are appropriated,

_6 Eastern Washington University shall:

_7 (1) Establish a campus climate that values diversity
and

_8 supports the success of all community members by: (a)
Creating a

_9 presidential commission on diversity to continuously
assess the

10 climate; (b) funding an analyst to establish baseline
data and

11 support continuous assessment of the campus climate; and
(c)

12 designing and implementing learning and development plans
for the

13 key constituents of the campus community, including
faculty,

14 staff, students, and surrounding community members that
will

15 include training, speakers, celebrative functions, and
social and

16 educational programs; and

17 (2) Employ strategies to strengthen academic support
programs

18 that assist underserved students in achieving their
academic

19 career goals, such as: (a) Funding the expansion of
Eastern

20 Washington University's Chicano education mentoring
program,

21 expand its efforts, including developing a comparable
program in

22 African-American and American Indian studies program;
(b) funding

23 the establishment of a center for campus diversity to
serve as a

24 campus resource as well as a coordinating center for
diversity

25 programs.

26 NEW SECTION. Sec. 11. To the extent funds
are appropriated,

27 Western Washington University shall:

28 (1) Establish a program to enhance diverse student
recruitment

29 and retention efforts that focus on intensive
orientation and

30 support programs to address needs of students of color;

31 (2) Increase diversification of Western Washington
University's

32 curriculum by: (a) Expanding the diversity fellowship
program; (b)

33 developing program grants through the center for
innovative

34 instruction that address diversity issues within the
curriculum;

35 and (c) enhancing employment outreach efforts;

36 (3) Establish a new beginnings summer camp for first

HB 1755 p. 6

_1 generation, low-income, first-time students. Intended
to support

_2 persistence at the university level, students in the
program shall

_3 complete one academic course while receiving an
intensive

_4 orientation preparing them for university-level work at
Western

_5 Washington University;

_6 (4) Develop additional freshmen interest groups
clusters with

_7 an emphasis in math, science, and technology that target
incoming

_8 first generation students and students of color who
display

_9 challenges in these areas; and

10 (5) Establish Woodring College of Education
participation in

11 summer academic institutes designed to develop
curriculum,

12 instruct institute programs, evaluate instruction
techniques and

13 content, and use evaluations for development of teacher
education

14 curriculum.

15 NEW SECTION. Sec. 12. To the extent funds
are appropriated, The

16 Evergreen State College shall:

17 (1) Establish an outreach program to minority and
low-income

18 students from Yakima, Tri-Cities, Tacoma, Vancouver,
Shelton, and

19 tribal and migrant communities to bring these students
to The

20 Evergreen State College campus for orientation about
college

21 resources and offerings;

22 (2) Develop, as a supplement to the outreach
program, alumni of

23 color and currently enrolled student of color ambassador
programs

24 to provide ongoing outreach activities in the target
communities;

25 (3) Develop new orientation programs that incorporate
an

26 enhanced academic component for all students and a
live-in program

27 of mentoring and academic workshops designed to ease the

28 integration of newly enrolled students of color; and

29 (4) Establish a reach back college readiness program
that will

30 focus on middle school students who live in areas with
high levels

31 of poverty and little evidence of high academic
achievement and

32 success attainment. The reach back program shall
provide direct

33 professional support to the counseling and instructional
staff in

34 the areas of counseling, academic advising, tutoring,
mentoring,

35 and enrichments. Specific emphasis will be on outreach
to segments

36 of the population at high risk for gang and domestic
violence and

37 alcohol and drug abuse.

p. 7 HB
1755

_1 NEW SECTION. Sec. 13. This chapter may be
known and cited as the

_2 college awareness project act.

_3 NEW SECTION. Sec. 14. Representatives from
the college awareness

_4 project steering committee shall report to the policy
committees

_5 of the house of representatives and senate on the
success of the

_6 college awareness project in the 2003 legislative
session.

_7 NEW SECTION. Sec. 15. Sections 1 through
13 of this act

_8 constitute a new chapter in Title 28B RCW.

_9 NEW SECTION. Sec. 16. (1) The sum of three
million eight hundred

10 seventy-nine thousand six hundred sixty-four dollars, or
as much

11 thereof as may be necessary, is appropriated for the
fiscal year

12 ending June 30, 2002, from the general fund to the
evergreen

13 center for educational improvement for the purposes of

14 implementing sections 2 through 4 of this act.

15 (2) The sum of three million eight hundred
seventy-nine

16 thousand six hundred sixty-four dollars, or as much
thereof as may

17 be necessary, is appropriated for the fiscal year ending
June 30,

18 2003, from the general fund to the evergreen center for

19 educational improvement for the purposes of implementing
sections

20 2 through 4 of this act.

21 NEW SECTION. Sec. 17. (1) The sum of one
million one hundred

22 thousand dollars, or as much thereof as may be
necessary, is

23 appropriated for the fiscal year ending June 30, 2002,
from the

24 general fund to the University of Washington for the
purposes of

25 section 7 of this act.

26 (2) The sum of one million one hundred thousand
dollars, or as

27 much thereof as may be necessary, is appropriated for
the fiscal

28 year ending June 30, 2003, from the general fund to the
University

29 of Washington for the purposes of section 7 of this act.

30 NEW SECTION. Sec. 18. (1) The sum of seven
hundred fifty

31 thousand dollars, or as much thereof as may be
necessary, is

HB 1755 p. 8

_1 appropriated for the fiscal year ending June 30, 2002,
from the

_2 general fund to Washington State University for the
purposes of

_3 section 8 of this act.

_4 (2) The sum of seven hundred fifty thousand dollars,
or as much

_5 thereof as may be necessary, is appropriated for the
fiscal year

_6 ending June 30, 2003, from the general fund to
Washington State

_7 University for the purposes of section 8 of this act.

_8 NEW SECTION. Sec. 19. (1) The sum of four
hundred fifty thousand

_9 six hundred twenty-five dollars, or as much thereof as
may be

10 necessary, is appropriated for the fiscal year ending
June 30,

11 2002, from the general fund to Central Washington
University for

12 the purposes of section 9 of this act.

13 (2) The sum of four hundred fifty thousand six
hundred twenty-

14 five dollars, or as much thereof as may be necessary, is

15 appropriated for the fiscal year ending June 30, 2003,
from the

16 general fund to Central Washington University for the
purposes of

17 section 9 of this act.

18 NEW SECTION. Sec. 20. (1) The sum of four
hundred twenty-four

19 thousand two hundred eighty-one dollars, or as much
thereof as may

20 be necessary, is appropriated for the fiscal year ending
June 30,

21 2002, from the general fund to Eastern Washington
University for

22 the purposes of section 10 of this act.

23 (2) The sum of four hundred twenty-four thousand two
hundred

24 eighty-one dollars, or as much thereof as may be
necessary, is

25 appropriated for the fiscal year ending June 30, 2003,
from the

26 general fund to Eastern Washington University for the
purposes of

27 section 10 of this act.

28 NEW SECTION. Sec. 21. (1) The sum of six
hundred sixteen

29 thousand seven hundred eighty-four dollars, or as much
thereof as

30 may be necessary, is appropriated for the fiscal year
ending June

31 30, 2002, from the general fund to Western Washington
University

32 for the purposes of section 11 of this act.

33 (2) The sum of six hundred sixty thousand eight
hundred thirty-

34 nine dollars, or as much thereof as may be necessary, is

p. 9 HB
1755

_1 appropriated for the fiscal year ending June 30, 2003,
from the

_2 general fund to Western Washington University for the
purposes of

_3 section 11 of this act.

_4 NEW SECTION. Sec. 22. (1) The sum of three
hundred ten thousand

_5 dollars, or as much thereof as may be necessary, is
appropriated

_6 for the fiscal year ending June 30, 2002, from the
general fund to

_7 The Evergreen State College for the purposes of section
12 of this

_8 act.

_9 (2) The sum of three hundred ten thousand dollars,
or as much

10 thereof as may be necessary, is appropriated for the
fiscal year

11 ending June 30, 2003, from the general fund to The
Evergreen State

12 College for the purposes of section 12 of this act.

‑‑‑ END ‑‑‑

HB 1755 p. 10