BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF
WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec.
1. The legislature finds
that there may be increased efficiencies in the provision of law library
services through the use of available online electronic research tools.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
2. A new section is added
to chapter 27.24 RCW to read as follows:

(1) The state library
shall investigate the possibility of contracting with a vendor or vendors of
online electronic legal research services for the provision of such services
statewide through the county law library system.

(2) If the state
library determines that such a contract would be an improvement in the
efficiency of the delivery of law library services in the counties, after June
30, 2002, the state library may enter into such a contract. If the state
library enters into a contract, the state library shall provide for the
availability of an online electronic research system at any county law library
that chooses to contract with the state library for such services. Any such
system shall allow for librarians and patrons to use the research services
either at the library facility or through electronic connection with the
library.

(3) As
part of a contract with a county law library, the state library may charge a
fee to any county law library that chooses to use the system made available by
the state library. A county law library may charge a fee to any patron for the
use of the system.

---
END ---