BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF
WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec.
1. The definitions in this
section apply throughout this chapter unless the context clearly requires
otherwise.

(1) "Certificate
of civil union" means a document that certifies that the persons named in
the certificate have established a civil union in this state in compliance with
this chapter.

(2) "Civil
union" means that two eligible persons have established a legal
relationship pursuant to this chapter, and may receive the benefits and
protections and be subject to the obligations and responsibilities of spouses.

(3)
"Marriage" means marriage as defined in RCW 26.04.010.

(4) "Party to a
civil union" or "partner in a civil union" means a person who
has established a civil union pursuant to this chapter.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
2. (1) Parties to a civil
union must satisfy the following criteria in order to establish a civil union:

(a) Neither party may
be a party to another civil union or a marriage;

(b) The parties to the
civil union must be of the same sex and therefore excluded from the marriage
laws of this state;

(c) The parties may not
be nearer of kin to each other than second cousins, whether of the whole or
half blood;

(d) Both parties must
be eighteen years of age or older; and

(e) Both parties must
be capable of consenting to the civil union.

(2) A civil union that
violates subsection (1)(a), (b), or (c) of this section is void.

(3) When either party
to a civil union is incapable of consenting to the civil union, for lack of
legal age or a sufficient understanding, or when the consent of either party is
obtained by force or fraud, the civil union is voidable, but only at the suit
of the party who lacked capacity to consent, or upon whom the force or fraud
was imposed.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
3. (1) It is unlawful for a
woman to enter a civil union with her father's sister, mother's sister,
daughter, sister, son's daughter, daughter's daughter, brother's daughter, or
sister's daughter. It is unlawful for a man to enter a civil union with his
father's brother, mother's brother, son, brother, son's son, daughter's son,
brother's son, or sister's son.

(2) A civil union
between two persons that is recognized as valid in another jurisdiction is
valid in this state only if the civil union is not prohibited under section
2(1) (a) or (b) of this act or made unlawful under this section.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
4. (1) Parties to a civil
union have all the same benefits, protections, obligations, and
responsibilities under law, whether they derive from statute, administrative or
court rule, policy, common law, or any other source of civil law, as are
granted to spouses in a marriage.

(2) A party to a civil
union shall be included in any definition or use of the terms
"spouse," "family," "immediate family,"
"dependent," "next of kin," and other terms that denote the
spousal relationship, as those terms are used throughout the law.

(3) Parties to a civil
union are responsible for the support of one another to the same degree and in
the same manner as prescribed under law for married persons.

(4) The law of domestic
relations, including community property, separation and dissolution, child
custody and support, property division, and maintenance apply to parties to a
civil union.

(5) Parties to a civil
union may modify the terms, conditions, or effects of their civil union in the
same manner and to the same extent as married persons who execute an agreement
recognized and enforceable under the law, setting forth particular
understandings with respect to their union.

(6) The rights of
parties to a civil union, with respect to a child of whom either party becomes
the natural parent during the term of the civil union, is the same as those of
a married couple, with respect to a child of whom either spouse becomes the
natural parent during the marriage.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
5. The family court has
jurisdiction over all proceedings relating to the dissolution of civil unions.
The dissolution of civil unions shall follow the same procedures and are
subject to the same substantive rights and obligations that are involved in the
dissolution of marriage in accordance with chapter 26.09 RCW, including child
support, parenting plans, property division, and maintenance.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
6. The following named
officers and persons, active or retired, are hereby authorized to certify civil
unions: Justices of the supreme court, judges of the court of appeals, judges
of the superior courts, superior court commissioners, any regularly licensed or
ordained minister or any priest of any church or religious denomination, and
judges of courts of limited jurisdiction as defined in RCW 3.02.010.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
7. A civil union certified
by any person who falsely professes to be a judicial officer or a minister or
priest of any religious denomination in this state or who falsely professes to
be an authorized officer thereof, is valid if the civil union is otherwise
valid and was entered into with a belief on the part of either party that he or
she has been lawfully joined in a civil union.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
8. In the certification of a
civil union no particular form is required, except that the parties shall
assent or declare in the presence of the minister, priest, or judicial officer
who is certifying the civil union, and in the presence of at least two
attending witnesses, that they take each other to be joined in a civil union.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
9. The person certifying a
civil union shall give to each of the parties, if required, a certificate
specifying the names and residence of the parties, and of at least two
witnesses present, the time and place of the civil union, the date of the
certification, and by whom issued.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
10. A person certifying a
civil union shall, within thirty days thereafter, make and deliver to the
county auditor of the county wherein the license was issued a certificate for
the files of the county auditor, and a certificate for the files of the state
registrar of vital statistics. The certificate for the files of the county
auditor shall be substantially as follows:

STATE OF
WASHINGTON B

C

COUNTY OF............... D

This is to certify that
the undersigned, a . . . . . ., by authority of a
license bearing date the . . . . day of . . . . . .
A.D., 20. . ., and issued by the county auditor of the county of
. . . . . ., did, on the . . . . day of
. . . . . . A.D., 20. . ., at . . . . . .
in this county and state, join in a lawful civil union A.B. of the county of
. . . . . ., state of . . . . . .
and C.D. of the county of . . . . . ., state of
. . . . . ., with their mutual assent, in the presence
of F H and E G, witnesses.

In Testimony Whereof,
witness the signatures of the parties to the ceremony, the witnesses and
myself, this . . . . day of
. . . . . ., A.D., 20. . .

The certificate form
for the files of the state registrar of vital statistics shall be the
Washington department of health marriage certificate form. The certificate
forms for the files of the county auditor and for the files of the state
registrar of vital statistics shall be provided by the state registrar of vital
statistics.

Any person certifying a
civil union, who willfully refuses or neglects to make and deliver the
certificates to the county auditor for record within the time specified is
guilty of a misdemeanor, and upon conviction shall pay a fine of not less than
twenty-five nor more than three hundred dollars.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
11. The county auditor shall
file the certificates and record them or bind them into numbered volumes, and
note on the original index to the license issued the volume and page where the
certificate is recorded or bound. The county auditor shall enter the date of
filing and his or her name on the certificates for the files of the state
registrar of vital statistics, and transmit, by the tenth day of each month,
all certificates filed with him or her during the preceding month.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
12. (1) Before any persons
may enter into a civil union, they must obtain a civil union license from the
county auditor, upon payment of a civil union license fee as fixed in RCW
36.18.010.

A person may secure by
mail an application for a civil union license from the county auditor of the
county where the person intends to enter into a civil union, and execute and
acknowledge the application before a notary public.

Application for a civil
union license must be made and filed with the appropriate county auditor upon
blanks to be provided by the county auditor for that purpose. The application
shall be under the oath of each of the applicants, and each application shall
state the name, address at the time of execution of application, age, social
security number, birthplace, whether single, widowed, or divorced, whether
under the control of a guardian, and residence during the past six months.
Each county may require such other information on the application as it deems
necessary.

(2) The county
legislative authority may impose an additional fee up to fifteen dollars on a
civil union license for the purpose of funding family services such as family
support centers.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
13. In addition to the
application provided for in section 12 of this act, the county auditor for the
county wherein the license is issued shall submit to each applicant at the time
of application for a license the Washington state department of health civil
union certificate form to be completed by the applicants and returned to the
county auditor for the files of the state registrar of vital statistics. After
the execution of the application for, and the issuance of a license, no county
shall require the persons authorized to certify civil unions to obtain any
further information from the persons entering into the civil union except the
names and county of residence of the parties.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
14. The county auditor may
issue the civil union license at the time of application, but shall issue the
license no later than the third full day following the date of the
application. A civil union license issued according to the provisions of this
chapter may not be used until three days after the date of application and
becomes void if the civil union is not certified within sixty days of the date
of the issuance of the license. The county auditor shall notify the applicant
in writing of this requirement at the time of issuance of the license.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
15. A county auditor is
authorized to refuse to issue a license to enter into a civil union if the
applications executed by the parties or information coming to the county
auditor's knowledge as a result of the execution of the applications justifies
the refusal. A party who is denied a license may appeal to the superior court
of the county for an order to show cause, directed to the county auditor, to
appear before the court to show why the court should not grant an order to
issue a license to the denied party. After a hearing, or if the auditor fails
to appear, the court may in its discretion issue an order to the auditor
directing him or her to issue the license. Hearings held by a superior court
may, in the discretion of the court, be held in chambers.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
16. (1) Civil union license
applications shall be open to public inspection as a part of the records of the
office of the county auditor.

(2) The county auditor
may preserve copies of civil union license applications submitted and civil
union licenses issued under this chapter in the same manner as authorized for
the recording of instruments under RCW 65.04.040.

(3) If a program
participant under chapter 40.24 RCW notifies the appropriate county auditor as
required under rules adopted by the secretary of state, the county auditor
shall not make available for inspection or copying the name and address of a
program participant contained in civil union license applications and records
filed under chapter 26.04 RCW, except under the following circumstances:

(a) If requested by a
law enforcement agency, to the law enforcement agency; and

(b) If directed by a
court order, to a person identified in the order.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
17. Any person intentionally
violating any provision of sections 13 through 16 of this act is guilty of a
misdemeanor.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
18. (1) The county auditor,
before a civil union license is issued, shall require each applicant to make
and file in the auditor's office upon blanks to be provided by the county for
that purpose, an affidavit showing that, if an applicant has a contagious
sexually transmitted disease, the condition is known to both applicants. In
addition, the affidavit shall state that the applicants are each eighteen years
of age or older. If written consent is obtained of the father, mother, or
legal guardian of the person for whom the license is required, the license may
be granted in cases where a party has attained the age of seventeen years. The
affidavit may be subscribed and sworn to before any person authorized to
administer oaths. Anyone knowingly swearing falsely to any of the statements
contained in the affidavit is guilty of perjury.

(2) The affidavit form
shall be designed to require a statement that no contagious sexually
transmitted disease is present or that the condition is known to both
applicants, without requiring the applicants to state whether or not either or
both of them has a sexually transmitted disease.

(3) A person who
knowingly violates any of the provisions of this section shall, upon
conviction, be punished by a fine of not more than one thousand dollars, or by
imprisonment in a state correctional facility for a period of not more than
three years, or by both such fine and imprisonment.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
19. The county auditor who
issues the civil union license, before delivering it, shall enter in the civil
union record a memorandum of the names of the parties, the consent of the
parents or guardian, if required, and the name of the affiant and the substance
of the affidavit upon which the license issued, and the date of the license.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
20. A person who undertakes
to certify civil unions knowing that he or she is not lawfully authorized to do
so, or a person who is authorized to certify civil unions, who does so contrary
to the provisions of this chapter, shall, upon conviction, be punished by a
fine of not more than five hundred nor less than one hundred dollars.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
21. Every person who
certifies a civil union when the person knows that either party to the civil
union is under the age of legal consent or that there is a legal impediment to
entering the civil union is guilty of a gross misdemeanor.

Sec. 22. RCW 26.04.020 and 1998 c
1 s 4 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) Marriages in the
following cases are prohibited:

(a) When either party
thereto has a wife ((or)), husband, or civil union partner
living at the time of such marriage;

(b) When the husband
and wife are nearer of kin to each other than second cousins, whether of the
whole or half blood computing by the rules of the civil law; or

(c) When the parties
are persons other than a male and a female.

(2) It is unlawful for
any man to marry his father's sister, mother's sister, daughter, sister, son's
daughter, daughter's daughter, brother's daughter or sister's daughter; it is
unlawful for any woman to marry her father's brother, mother's brother, son,
brother, son's son, daughter's son, brother's son or sister's son.

(3) A
marriage between two persons that is recognized as valid in another
jurisdiction is valid in this state only if the marriage is not prohibited or
made unlawful under subsection (1)(a), (1)(c), or (2) of this section.

Sec. 23. RCW 26.12.220 and 1994 c
267 s 4 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) The legislative
authority of any county may authorize family court services as provided in RCW
26.12.230. The legislative authority may impose a fee in excess of that
prescribed in RCW 36.18.010 for the issuance of a marriage license or civil
union license. The fee shall not exceed eight dollars.

(2) In addition to any
other funds used therefor, the governing body of any county shall use the
proceeds from the fee increase authorized by this section to pay the expenses
of the family court and the family court services under chapter 26.12 RCW. If
there is no family court in the county, the legislative authority may provide
such services through other county agencies or may contract with a public or
private agency or person to provide such services. Family court services also
may be provided jointly with other counties as provided in RCW 26.12.230.

(3) The family court
services program may hire professional employees to provide the investigation,
evaluation and reporting, and mediation services, or the county may contract
for these services, or both. To facilitate and promote the purposes of this
chapter, the court may order or recommend the aid of physicians, psychiatrists,
or other specialists.

(4) The family court
services program may provide or contract for: (a) Mediation; (b)
investigation, evaluation, and reporting to the court; and (c) reconciliation;
and may provide a referral mechanism for drug and alcohol testing, monitoring,
and treatment; and any other treatment, parenting, or anger management programs
the family court professional considers necessary or appropriate.

(5) Services other than
family court investigation, evaluation, reconciliation, and mediation services
shall be at the expense of the parties involved absent a court order to the
contrary. The parties shall bear all or a portion of the cost of parenting
seminars and family court investigation, evaluation, reconciliation, and
mediation services according to the parties' ability to pay.

(6) The county legislative
authority may establish rules of eligibility for the family court services
funded under this section. The rules shall not conflict with rules of the
court adopted under chapter 26.12 RCW or any other statute.

(7) The legislative
authority may establish fees for family court investigation, evaluation,
reconciliation, and mediation services under this chapter according to the
parties' ability to pay for the services. Fees collected under this section
shall be collected and deposited in the same manner as other county funds are
collected and deposited, and shall be maintained in a separate account to be
used as provided in this section.

Sec. 24. RCW 36.18.010 and 1999 c
233 s 3 are each amended to read as follows:

County auditors or
recording officers shall collect the following fees for their official
services:

For recording
instruments, for the first page eight and one-half by fourteen inches or less,
five dollars; for each additional page eight and one-half by fourteen inches or
less, one dollar. The fee for recording multiple transactions contained in one
instrument will be calculated for each transaction requiring separate indexing
as required under RCW 65.04.050 as follows: The fee for each title or transaction
is the same fee as the first page of any additional recorded document; the fee
for additional pages is the same fee as for any additional pages for any
recorded document; the fee for the additional pages may be collected only once
and may not be collected for each title or transaction;

For preparing and
certifying copies, for the first page eight and one-half by fourteen inches or
less, three dollars; for each additional page eight and one-half by fourteen
inches or less, one dollar;

For preparing
noncertified copies, for each page eight and one-half by fourteen inches or
less, one dollar;

For administering an
oath or taking an affidavit, with or without seal, two dollars;

For issuing a marriage
license or civil union license, eight dollars, (this fee includes taking
necessary affidavits, filing returns, indexing, and transmittal of a record of
the marriage or civil union to the state registrar of vital statistics)
plus an additional five-dollar fee for use and support of the prevention of
child abuse and neglect activities to be transmitted monthly to the state
treasurer and deposited in the state general fund plus an additional ten-dollar
fee to be transmitted monthly to the state treasurer and deposited in the state
general fund. The legislature intends to appropriate an amount at least equal
to the revenue generated by this fee for the purposes of the displaced
homemaker act, chapter 28B.04 RCW;

For searching records
per hour, eight dollars;

For recording plats,
fifty cents for each lot except cemetery plats for which the charge shall be
twenty-five cents per lot; also one dollar for each acknowledgment, dedication,
and description: PROVIDED, That there shall be a minimum fee of twenty-five
dollars per plat;

For recording of miscellaneous
records not listed above, for the first page eight and one-half by fourteen
inches or less, five dollars; for each additional page eight and one-half by
fourteen inches or less, one dollar;

For modernization and
improvement of the recording and indexing system, a surcharge as provided in
RCW 36.22.170.

For recording an
emergency nonstandard document as provided in RCW 65.04.047, fifty dollars, in
addition to all other applicable recording fees.

Sec. 25. RCW 43.70.150 and 1989
1st ex.s. c 9 s 254 are each amended to read as follows:

The secretary of health
shall have charge of the state system of registration of births, deaths, fetal
deaths, marriages, civil unions, and decrees of divorce, annulment and
separate maintenance, and shall prepare the necessary rules, forms, and blanks
for obtaining records, and insure the faithful registration thereof.

Sec. 26. RCW 43.70.160 and 1989
1st ex.s. c 9 s 255 are each amended to read as follows:

The state
registrar of vital statistics shall prepare, print, and supply to all
registrars all blanks and forms used in registering, recording, and preserving
the returns, or in otherwise carrying out the purposes of Title 70 RCW; and
shall prepare and issue such detailed instructions as may be required to secure
the uniform observance of its provisions and the maintenance of a perfect
system of registration. No other blanks shall be used than those supplied by
the state registrar. The state registrar shall carefully examine the
certificates received monthly from the local registrars, county auditors, and
clerks of the court and, if any are incomplete or unsatisfactory, the state
registrar shall require such further information to be furnished as may be necessary
to make the record complete and satisfactory, and shall cause such further
information to be incorporated in or attached to and filed with the
certificate. The state registrar shall furnish, arrange, bind, and make a
permanent record of the certificate in a systematic manner, and shall prepare
and maintain a comprehensive index of all births, deaths, fetal deaths,
marriages, civil unions, and decrees of divorce, annulment and separate
maintenance registered.

Sec. 27. RCW 70.58.005 and 1991 c
3 s 342 are each amended to read as follows:

Unless the context
clearly requires otherwise, the definitions in this section apply throughout
this chapter.

(1)
"Department" means the department of health.

(2) "Vital
records" means records of birth, death, fetal death, marriage, civil
union, dissolution, annulment, and legal separation, as maintained under
the supervision of the state registrar of vital statistics.

Sec. 28. RCW 70.58.104 and 1991 c
96 s 4 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) The state registrar
may prepare typewritten, photographic, electronic, or other reproductions of
records of birth, death, fetal death, marriage, civil union, or decrees
of divorce, annulment, or legal separation registered under law or that portion
of the record of any birth which shows the child's full name, sex, date of
birth, and date of filing of the certificate. Such reproductions, when
certified by the state registrar, shall be considered for all purposes the same
as the original and shall be prima facie evidence of the facts stated therein.

(2) The department may
authorize by regulation the disclosure of information contained in vital
records for research purposes. All research proposals must be submitted to the
department and must be reviewed and approved as to scientific merit and to
ensure that confidentiality safeguards are provided in accordance with
department policy.

(3) Local registrars
may, upon request, furnish certified copies of the records of birth, death, and
fetal death, subject to all provisions of state law applicable to the state
registrar.

Sec. 29. RCW 70.58.107 and 1997 c
223 s 1 are each amended to read as follows:

The department of
health shall charge a fee of thirteen dollars for certified copies of records
and for copies or information provided for research, statistical, or
administrative purposes, and eight dollars for a search of the files or records
when no copy is made. The department shall prescribe by regulation fees to be
paid for preparing sealed files and for opening sealed files.

No fee may be demanded
or required for furnishing certified copies of a birth, death, fetal death,
marriage, civil union, divorce, annulment, or legal separation record
for use in connection with a claim for compensation or pension pending before
the veterans administration.

The department shall
keep a true and correct account of all fees received and turn the fees over to
the state treasurer on a weekly basis.

Local registrars shall
charge the same fees as the state as hereinabove provided and as prescribed by
department regulation, except that local registrars shall charge thirteen
dollars for the first copy of a death certificate and eight dollars for each
additional copy of the same death certificate when the additional copies are
ordered at the same time as the first copy. All such fees collected, except
for five dollars of each fee for the issuance of a certified copy, shall be
paid to the jurisdictional health department.

All local registrars in
cities and counties shall keep a true and correct account of all fees received
under this section for the issuance of certified copies and shall turn five
dollars of the fee over to the state treasurer on or before the first day of
January, April, July, and October.

Five dollars of each
fee imposed for the issuance of certified copies, except for copies suitable
for display issued under RCW 70.58.085, at both the state and local levels
shall be held by the state treasurer in the death investigations' account
established by RCW 43.79.445.

Sec. 30. RCW 9A.64.010 and 1986 c
257 s 14 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) A person is guilty
of bigamy if he or she:

(a) Intentionally
marries or purports to marry another person when either person has a living
spouse; or

(b) Intentionally
enters into a civil union or purports to enter into a civil union when either
person has a living civil union partner.

(2) In any prosecution
under this section, it is a defense that at the time of the subsequent marriage
or civil union or purported marriage or civil union:

(a) The actor
reasonably believed that the prior spouse or civil union partner was
dead; or

(b) A court had entered
a judgment purporting to terminate or annul any prior disqualifying marriage or
civil union and the actor did not know that such judgment was invalid; or

(c) The actor
reasonably believed that he or she was legally eligible to marry or
enter into a civil union.

(3) The limitation
imposed by RCW 9A.04.080 on commencing a prosecution for bigamy does not begin
to run until the death of the prior or subsequent spouse or civil union
partner of the actor or until a court enters a judgment terminating or
annulling the prior or subsequent marriage or civil union.

(4) Bigamy is a class C
felony.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 31. Sections 1 through 21 of
this act constitute a new chapter in Title 26 RCW.

---
END ---