BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF
WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1. RCW 69.50.412 and 1981 c
48 s 2 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) It is unlawful for
any person to use drug paraphernalia to plant, propagate, cultivate, grow,
harvest, manufacture, compound, convert, produce, process, prepare, test,
analyze, pack, repack, store, contain, conceal, inject, ingest, inhale, or
otherwise introduce into the human body a controlled substance. Any person who
violates this subsection is guilty of a misdemeanor.

(2) It is unlawful for
any person to deliver, possess with intent to deliver, or manufacture with
intent to deliver drug paraphernalia, knowing, or under circumstances where one
reasonably should know, that it will be used to plant, propagate, cultivate,
grow, harvest, manufacture, compound, convert, produce, process, prepare, test,
analyze, pack, repack, store, contain, conceal, inject, ingest, inhale, or
otherwise introduce into the human body a controlled substance. Any person who
violates this subsection is guilty of a misdemeanor.

(3) Any person eighteen
years of age or over who violates subsection (2) of this section by delivering
drug paraphernalia to a person under eighteen years of age who is at least
three years his junior is guilty of a gross misdemeanor.

(4) It is unlawful for
any person to place in any newspaper, magazine, handbill, or other publication
any advertisement, knowing, or under circumstances where one reasonably should
know, that the purpose of the advertisement, in whole or in part, is to promote
the sale of objects designed or intended for use as drug paraphernalia. Any
person who violates this subsection is guilty of a misdemeanor.

(5) It
is lawful for any person over the age of eighteen to possess up to ten sterile
hypodermic syringes and needles for the purpose of reducing bloodborne
diseases.

Sec. 2. RCW 69.50.4121 and 1998
c 317 s 1 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) Every person who
sells or gives, or permits to be sold or given to any person any drug
paraphernalia in any form commits a class I civil infraction under chapter 7.80
RCW. For purposes of this subsection, "drug paraphernalia" means all
equipment, products, and materials of any kind which are used, intended for
use, or designed for use in planting, propagating, cultivating, growing,
harvesting, manufacturing, compounding, converting, producing, processing,
preparing, testing, analyzing, packaging, repackaging, storing, containing,
concealing, injecting, ingesting, inhaling, or otherwise introducing into the
human body a controlled substance. Drug paraphernalia includes, but is not
limited to objects used, intended for use, or designed for use in ingesting,
inhaling, or otherwise introducing marihuana, cocaine, hashish, or hashish oil
into the human body, such as:

(a) Metal, wooden,
acrylic, glass, stone, plastic, or ceramic pipes with or without screens, permanent
screens, hashish heads, or punctured metal bowls;

(b) Water pipes;

(c) Carburetion tubes
and devices;

(d) Smoking and
carburetion masks;

(e) Roach clips:
Meaning objects used to hold burning material, such as a marihuana cigarette,
that has become too small or too short to be held in the hand;

(f) Miniature cocaine
spoons and cocaine vials;

(g) Chamber pipes;

(h) Carburetor pipes;

(i) Electric pipes;

(j) Air-driven pipes;

(k) Chillums;

(l) Bongs; and

(m) Ice pipes or
chillers.

(2) It shall be no
defense to a prosecution for a violation of this section that the person acted,
or was believed by the defendant to act, as agent or representative of another.

(3) Nothing in
subsection (1) of this section prohibits legal distribution of injection
syringe equipment through public health and community based HIV prevention
programs, and pharmacies.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
3. A new section is added
to chapter 70.115 RCW to read as follows:

Nothing contained in
this act shall be construed to require a pharmacist to sell hypodermic needles
or syringes to any person.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
4. A new section is added
to chapter 70.115 RCW to read as follows:

(1) The sale of sterile
hypodermic syringes and needles to reduce the transmission of bloodborne
diseases is a legal use for the purposes of RCW 70.115.050.

(2) Sales under this
section must be limited to individuals over eighteen years of age. A maximum
of ten sterile hypodermic syringes and needles may be purchased at one time.
The retailer may provide drug prevention and treatment materials at the point
of sale.

(3) The Washington
state board of pharmacy, created in RCW 18.64.001, must adopt rules implementing
the provisions of this section.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
5. A new section is added
to chapter 70.115 RCW to read as follows:

The sale
of sterile hypodermic syringes and needles under this act is limited to devices
with a physical attribute built into them that effectively reduces the risk of
an exposure incident by a mechanism such as barrier creation, blunting,
encapsulation, withdrawal, retraction, destruction, or other effective
mechanism.

---
END ---