BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF
WASHINGTON:

_6 Sec. 1. RCW
41.05.065 and 1996 c 140 s 1 are each amended to read

_7 as follows:

_8 (1) The board shall study all matters connected with
the

_9 provision of health care coverage, life insurance,
liability

10 insurance, accidental death and dismemberment insurance,
and

11 disability income insurance or any of, or a combination
of, the

12 enumerated types of insurance for employees and their
dependents

13 on the best basis possible with relation both to the
welfare of

14 the employees and to the state. However, liability
insurance shall

15 not be made available to dependents.

16 (2) The board shall develop employee benefit plans
that include

17 comprehensive health care benefits for all employees.
In developing

18 these plans, the board shall consider the following
elements:

p. 1 HB
1760

_1 (a) Methods of maximizing cost containment while
ensuring

_2 access to quality health care;

_3 (b) Development of provider arrangements that
encourage cost

_4 containment and ensure access to quality care, including
but not

_5 limited to prepaid delivery systems and prospective
payment

_6 methods;

_7 (c) Wellness incentives that focus on proven
strategies, such

_8 as smoking cessation, injury and accident prevention, reduction
of

_9 alcohol misuse, appropriate weight reduction, exercise,
automobile

10 and motorcycle safety, blood cholesterol reduction, and
nutrition

11 education;

12 (d) Utilization review procedures including, but not
limited to

13 a cost-efficient method for prior authorization of
services,

14 hospital inpatient length of stay review, requirements
for use of

15 outpatient surgeries and second opinions for surgeries,
review of

16 invoices or claims submitted by service providers, and
performance

17 audit of providers;

18 (e) Effective coordination of benefits;

19 (f) Minimum standards for insuring entities; and

20 (g) Minimum scope and content of public employee
benefit plans

21 to be offered to enrollees participating in the employee
health

22 benefit plans. To maintain the comprehensive nature of
employee

23 health care benefits, employee eligibility criteria
related to the

24 number of hours worked and the benefits provided to
employees

25 shall be substantially equivalent to the state employees'
health

26 benefits plan and eligibility criteria in effect on
January 1,

27 1993. Nothing in this subsection (2)(g) shall prohibit
changes or

28 increases in employee point-of-service payments or
employee

29 premium payments for benefits.

30 (3)(a) The board shall design benefits and
determine the terms

31 and conditions of employee participation and coverage,
including

32 establishment of eligibility criteria.

33 (b) Eligibility shall be extended exclusively to
employees and

34 their dependents, including lawful spouses, who
qualify according

35 to the eligibility requirements in effect on May 1,
2000.

36 (c) For purposes of eligibility, the term
"lawful spouse" means

37 a husband or a wife in a marriage recognized as valid
in

38 accordance with RCW 26.04.010 as amended by chapter
1, Laws of

HB 1760 p. 2

_1 1998 (reaffirming and protecting the institution of
marriage,

_2 known as the Washington state defense of marriage
act).

_3 (4) The board may authorize premium contributions
for an

_4 employee and the employee's dependents in a manner that
encourages

_5 the use of cost-efficient managed health care systems.

_6 (5) Employees shall choose participation in one of
the health

_7 care benefit plans developed by the board and may be
permitted to

_8 waive coverage under terms and conditions established by
the

_9 board.

10 (6) The board shall review plans proposed by
insuring entities

11 that desire to offer property insurance and/or accident
and

12 casualty insurance to state employees through payroll
deduction.

13 The board may approve any such plan for payroll
deduction by

14 insuring entities holding a valid certificate of
authority in the

15 state of Washington and which the board determines to be
in the

16 best interests of employees and the state. The board
shall

17 promulgate rules setting forth criteria by which it
shall evaluate

18 the plans.

19 (7) Before January 1, 1998, the public employees'
benefits

20 board shall make available one or more fully insured
long-term

21 care insurance plans that comply with the requirements
of chapter

22 48.84 RCW. Such programs shall be made available to
eligible

23 employees, retired employees, and retired school
employees as well

24 as eligible dependents which, for the purpose of this
section,

25 includes the parents of the employee or retiree and the
parents of

26 the spouse of the employee or retiree. Employees of
local

27 governments and employees of political subdivisions not
otherwise

28 enrolled in the public employees' benefits board
sponsored medical

29 programs may enroll under terms and conditions
established by the

30 administrator, if it does not jeopardize the financial
viability

31 of the public employees' benefits board's long-term care
offering.

32 (a) Participation of eligible employees or retired
employees

33 and retired school employees in any long-term care
insurance plan

34 made available by the public employees' benefits board
is

35 voluntary and shall not be subject to binding
arbitration under

36 chapter 41.56 RCW. Participation is subject to
reasonable

37 underwriting guidelines and eligibility rules
established by the

38 public employees' benefits board and the health care authority.

p. 3 HB
1760

_1 (b) The employee, retired employee, and retired
school employee

_2 are solely responsible for the payment of the premium
rates

_3 developed by the health care authority. The health care
authority

_4 is authorized to charge a reasonable administrative fee
in

_5 addition to the premium charged by the long-term care
insurer,

_6 which shall include the health care authority's cost of

_7 administration, marketing, and consumer education
materials

_8 prepared by the health care authority and the office of
the

_9 insurance commissioner.

10 (c) To the extent administratively possible, the
state shall

11 establish an automatic payroll or pension deduction
system for the

12 payment of the long-term care insurance premiums.

13 (d) The public employees' benefits board and the
health care

14 authority shall establish a technical advisory committee
to

15 provide advice in the development of the benefit design
and

16 establishment of underwriting guidelines and eligibility
rules.

17 The committee shall also advise the board and authority
on

18 effective and cost-effective ways to market and
distribute the

19 long-term care product. The technical advisory
committee shall be

20 comprised, at a minimum, of representatives of the
office of the

21 insurance commissioner, providers of long-term care
services,

22 licensed insurance agents with expertise in long-term
care

23 insurance, employees, retired employees, retired school
employees,

24 and other interested parties determined to be
appropriate by the

25 board.

26 (e) The health care authority shall offer employees,
retired

27 employees, and retired school employees the option of
purchasing

28 long-term care insurance through licensed agents or
brokers

29 appointed by the long-term care insurer. The authority,
in

30 consultation with the public employees' benefits board,
shall

31 establish marketing procedures and may consider all
premium

32 components as a part of the contract negotiations with
the long-

33 term care insurer.

34 (f) In developing the long-term care insurance
benefit designs,

35 the public employees' benefits board shall include an
alternative

36 plan of care benefit, including adult day services, as
approved by

37 the office of the insurance commissioner.

38 (g) The health care authority, with the cooperation
of the

HB 1760 p. 4

_1 office of the insurance commissioner, shall develop a
consumer

_2 education program for the eligible employees, retired
employees,

_3 and retired school employees designed to provide
education on the

_4 potential need for long-term care, methods of financing
long-term

_5 care, and the availability of long-term care insurance
products

_6 including the products offered by the board.

_7 (h) By December 1998, the health care authority, in

_8 consultation with the public employees' benefits board,
shall

_9 submit a report to the appropriate committees of the
legislature,

10 including an analysis of the marketing and distribution
of the

11 long-term care insurance provided under this section.

12 NEW SECTION. Sec. 2. A new section is
added to chapter 41.05

13 RCW to read as follows:

14 Each health plan offered to public employees under
this chapter

15 that is established or renewed after the effective date
of this

16 act shall extend eligibility exclusively to employees
and their

17 dependents as provided in this act.

18 NEW SECTION. Sec. 3. The secretary of state shall submit this

19 act to the people for their adoption and ratification,
or

20 rejection, at the next general election to be held in
this state,

21 in accordance with Article II, section 1 of the state
Constitution

22 and the laws adopted to facilitate its operation.

‑‑‑ END ‑‑‑

p. 5 HB
1760