BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF
WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec.
1. A new section is added
to chapter 82.04 RCW to read as follows:

(1) In computing the
tax imposed under this chapter, a taxpayer may claim a credit for all taxes
imposed under RCW 82.64.020 and paid to a wholesaler or to the department.
Credits shall not exceed the amount of tax paid by the taxpayer under this
chapter during the reporting period. Credits in excess of tax paid under this
chapter in a reporting period may be carried forward to future reporting
periods for a maximum of one year.

(2) For the purposes of
this section, "taxpayer" does not include a wholesaler with respect
to tax collected by the wholesaler and paid to the department under RCW
82.64.050.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 2. This act is necessary for
the immediate preservation of the public peace, health, or safety, or support of
the state government and its existing public institutions, and takes effect
July 1, 2001.

---
END ---