BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF
WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec.
1. A new section is added
to chapter 48.02 RCW to read as follows:

(1) Documents,
materials, or other information as described in subsection (5) of this section
are confidential by law and privileged, are not subject to public disclosure
under chapter 42.17 RCW and are not subject to subpoena directed to the
commissioner or any person who received documents, materials, or other
information while acting under the authority of the commissioner. The
commissioner is authorized to use such documents, materials, or other
information in the furtherance of any regulatory or legal action brought as a
part of the commissioner's official duties. The confidentiality and privilege
created by this section and section 2 of this act applies only to the
commissioner, any person acting under the authority of the commissioner, the
national association of insurance commissioners and its affiliates and
subsidiaries, regulatory and law enforcement officials of other states and
nations, the federal government, and international authorities.

(2) Neither the
commissioner nor any person who received documents, materials, or other
information while acting under the authority of the commissioner is permitted
or required to testify in any private civil action concerning any confidential
and privileged documents, materials, or information subject to subsection (1)
of this section.

(3) The commissioner:

(a) May share
documents, materials, or other information, including the confidential and
privileged documents, materials, or information subject to subsection (1) of
this section, with (i) the national association of insurance commissioners and
its affiliates and subsidiaries, and (ii) regulatory and law enforcement
officials of other states and nations, the federal government, and
international authorities, if the recipient agrees to maintain the
confidentiality and privileged status of the document, material, or other
information;

(b) May receive
documents, materials, or information, including otherwise either confidential
or privileged, or both, documents, materials, or information, from (i) the
national association of insurance commissioners and its affiliates and
subsidiaries, and (ii) regulatory and law enforcement officials of other states
and nations, the federal government, and international authorities and shall
maintain as confidential and privileged any document, material, or information
received that is either confidential or privileged, or both, under the laws of
the jurisdiction that is the source of the document, material, or information;
and

(c) May enter into
agreements governing the sharing and use of information consistent with this
subsection.

(4) No waiver of an
existing privilege or claim of confidentiality in the documents, materials, or
information may occur as a result of disclosure to the commissioner under this
section or as a result of sharing as authorized in subsection (3) of this
section.

(5) Documents,
materials, or information, which is either confidential or privileged, or both,
which has been provided to the commissioner by (a) the national association of
insurance commissioners and its affiliates and subsidiaries, (b) regulatory or
law enforcement officials of other states and nations, the federal government,
or international authorities, or (c) agencies of this state is confidential and
privileged only if the documents, materials, or information is protected from
disclosure by the applicable laws of the jurisdiction that is the source of the
document, material, or information.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
2. A new section is added
to chapter 42.17 RCW to read as follows:

Documents,
materials, or information obtained by the insurance commissioner under section
1 of this act are confidential and privileged and not subject to public
disclosure under this chapter.

---
END ---