BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF
WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1. RCW 9A.44.140 and 2000 c
91 s 3 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) The duty to
register under RCW 9A.44.130 shall end:

(a) For a person
convicted of a class A felony, or a person convicted of any sex offense or
kidnapping offense who has one or more prior convictions for a sex offense or
kidnapping offense: Such person may only be relieved of the duty to register
under subsection (3) or (4) of this section.

(b) For a person
convicted of a class B felony, and the person does not have one or more prior convictions
for a sex offense or kidnapping offense: Fifteen years after the last date of
release from confinement, if any, (including full-time residential treatment)
pursuant to the conviction, or entry of the judgment and sentence, if the
person has spent fifteen consecutive years in the community without being
convicted of any new offenses.

(c) For a person
convicted of a class C felony, a violation of RCW 9.68A.090 or 9A.44.096, or an
attempt, solicitation, or conspiracy to commit a class C felony, and the person
does not have one or more prior convictions for a sex offense or kidnapping
offense: Ten years after the last date of release from confinement, if any,
(including full-time residential treatment) pursuant to the conviction, or
entry of the judgment and sentence, if the person has spent ten consecutive
years in the community without being convicted of any new offenses.

(2) The provisions of
subsection (1) of this section shall apply equally to a person who has been
found not guilty by reason of insanity under chapter 10.77 RCW of a sex offense
or kidnapping offense.

(3)(a) Any person
having a duty to register under RCW 9A.44.130 may petition the superior court
to be relieved of that duty, if the person has spent ten consecutive years in
the community without being convicted of any new offenses. The petition shall
be made to the court in which the petitioner was convicted of the offense that
subjects him or her to the duty to register, or, in the case of convictions in
other states, a foreign country, or a federal or military court, to the court
in Thurston county. The prosecuting attorney of the county shall be named and
served as the respondent in any such petition. The court shall consider the
nature of the registrable offense committed, and the criminal and relevant
noncriminal behavior of the petitioner both before and after conviction, and
may consider other factors. Except as provided in subsection (4) of this
section, the court may relieve the petitioner of the duty to register only if
the petitioner shows, with clear and convincing evidence, that future
registration of the petitioner will not serve the purposes of RCW 9A.44.130,
10.01.200, 43.43.540, 46.20.187, 70.48.470, and 72.09.330.

(b)(i) The court may
not relieve a person of the duty to register if the person has been determined
to be a sexually violent predator as defined in RCW 71.09.020, or has been
convicted of a sex offense or kidnapping offense that is a class A felony and
that was committed with forcible compulsion on or after June 8, 2000.

(ii) Any person subject
to (b)(i) of this subsection may petition the court to be exempted from any
community notification requirements that the person may be subject to fifteen
years after the later of the entry of the judgment and sentence or the last
date of release from confinement, including full-time residential treatment,
pursuant to the conviction, if the person has spent the time in the community
without being convicted of any new offense.

(4) An offender having
a duty to register under RCW 9A.44.130 for a sex offense or kidnapping offense
committed when the offender was a juvenile may petition the superior court to
be relieved of that duty. The court shall consider the nature of the
registrable offense committed, and the criminal and relevant noncriminal
behavior of the petitioner both before and after adjudication, and may consider
other factors.

(a) Except as
provided in (c) of this subsection, the court may relieve the petitioner of
the duty to register for a sex offense or kidnapping offense that was committed
while the petitioner was ((fifteen)) thirteen years of age or
older only if the petitioner shows, with clear and convincing evidence, that
future registration of the petitioner will not serve the purposes of RCW
9A.44.130, 10.01.200, 43.43.540, 46.20.187, 70.48.470, and 72.09.330.

(b) Except as
provided in (c) of this subsection, the court may relieve the petitioner of
the duty to register for a sex offense or kidnapping offense that was committed
while the petitioner was under the age of ((fifteen)) thirteen if
the petitioner (i) has not been adjudicated of any additional sex offenses or
kidnapping offenses during the twenty-four months ((following the
adjudication)) after completion of the petitioner's supervision by the
department of social and health services for the offense giving rise to the
duty to register, and (ii) proves by a preponderance of the evidence that
future registration of the petitioner will not serve the purposes of RCW
9A.44.130, 10.01.200, 43.43.540, 46.20.187, 70.48.470, and 72.09.330.

(c) For a petitioner
convicted of a class A felony, or a petitioner convicted of any sex offense or
kidnapping offense who has one or more prior convictions for a sex offense or
kidnapping offense: Such petitioner may only be relieved of the duty to
register under subsection (3) of this section.

This subsection shall
not apply to juveniles prosecuted as adults.

(5) Unless relieved of
the duty to register pursuant to this section, a violation of RCW 9A.44.130 is
an ongoing offense for purposes of the statute of limitations under RCW
9A.04.080.

(6)
Nothing in RCW 9.94A.220 relating to discharge of an offender shall be
construed as operating to relieve the offender of his or her duty to register
pursuant to RCW 9A.44.130.

--- END ---