BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF
WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec.
1. A new section is added
to chapter 70.48 RCW to read as follows:

A city, town, or
county, or any combination thereof, may by ordinance award contracts to a
private jail contractor for jail services. If more than one governing unit
enters jointly into a contract with a private jail contractor under this
section, the legislative authority of each entity must pass an ordinance
awarding the contract. The contracts may be for the construction, lease,
operation, supervision, or maintenance of a jail. The contracts shall: (a) Be
in writing; (b) give the governing unit or units the responsibility for the
oversight, compliance, review, and audit of the contract and the private jail;
and (c) include the applicable charges for custody of the prisoners as well as
the basis for adjustments in the charges. The contracts may be terminated only
by ninety days' notice to the governing unit or units involved and the private
jail contractor. The notice shall state the grounds for termination and the
specific plans for accommodating the affected jail population.

Sec. 2. RCW 70.48.020 and 1987 c
462 s 6 are each amended to read as follows:

As used in this chapter
the words and phrases in this section shall have the meanings indicated unless
the context clearly requires otherwise.

(1) "Holding
facility" means a facility operated by or contracting with a
governing unit primarily designed, staffed, and used for the temporary housing
of adult persons charged with a criminal offense prior to trial or sentencing
and for the temporary housing of such persons during or after trial and/or
sentencing, but in no instance shall the housing exceed thirty days.

(2) "Detention
facility" means a facility operated by or contracting with a
governing unit primarily designed, staffed, and used for the temporary housing
of adult persons charged with a criminal offense prior to trial or sentencing
and for the housing of adult persons for purposes of punishment and correction
after sentencing or persons serving terms not to exceed ninety days.

(3) "Special
detention facility" means a minimum security facility operated by or
contracting with a governing unit primarily designed, staffed, and used for
the housing of special populations of sentenced persons who do not require the
level of security normally provided in detention and correctional facilities
including, but not necessarily limited to, persons convicted of offenses under
RCW 46.61.502 or 46.61.504.

(4) "Correctional
facility" means a facility operated by or contracting with a
governing unit primarily designed, staffed, and used for the housing of adult
persons serving terms not exceeding one year for the purposes of punishment,
correction, and rehabilitation following conviction of a criminal offense.

(5) "Jail"
means any holding, detention, special detention, or correctional facility as
defined in this section.

(6) "Health
care" means preventive, diagnostic, and rehabilitative services provided
by licensed health care professionals and/or facilities; such care to include
providing prescription drugs where indicated.

(7) "Governing
unit" means the city and/or county or any combinations of cities and/or
counties responsible for either the operation, supervision, and
maintenance of a jail, or contract compliance of a private jail contractor.

(8) "Private jail
contractor" means any company that provides services to a city or county
for the construction, operation, supervision, or maintenance of a jail.

(9) "Major
urban" means a county or combination of counties which has a city having a
population greater than twenty-six thousand based on the 1978 projections of
the office of financial management.

(((9))) (10)
"Medium urban" means a county or combination of counties which has a
city having a population equal to or greater than ten thousand but less than twenty-six
thousand based on the 1978 projections of the office of financial management.

(((10))) (11)
"Rural" means a county or combination of counties which has a city
having a population less than ten thousand based on the 1978 projections of the
office of financial management.

(((11))) (12)
"Office" means the office of financial management.

Sec. 3. RCW 70.48.090 and 1987 c
462 s 7 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) Contracts for jail
services may be made between a county and city located within the boundaries of
a county, ((and)) among counties, or between a city or county and a
private jail contractor. The contracts shall: Be in writing, give one
governing unit the responsibility for the operation of the jails, specify the
responsibilities of each governing unit involved, and include the applicable
charges for custody of the prisoners as well as the basis for adjustments in
the charges. The contracts may be terminated only by ninety days written
notice to the governing units involved and to the office. The notice shall
state the grounds for termination and the specific plans for accommodating the
affected jail population.

(2) The contract
authorized in subsection (1) of this section shall be for a minimum term of ten
years when state funds are provided to construct or remodel a jail in one
governing unit that will be used to house prisoners of other governing units.
The contract may not be terminated prior to the end of the term without the
office's approval. If the contract is terminated, or upon the expiration and
nonrenewal of the contract, the governing unit whose jail facility was built or
remodeled to hold the prisoners of other governing units shall pay to the state
treasurer the amount set by the corrections standards board or office when it
authorized disbursal of state funds for the remodeling or construction under
RCW 70.48.120. This amount shall be deposited in the local jail improvement
and construction account and shall fairly represent the construction costs
incurred in order to house prisoners from other governing units. The office
may pay the funds to the governing units which had previously contracted for
jail services under rules which the office may adopt. The acceptance of state
funds for constructing or remodeling consolidated jail facilities constitutes
agreement to the proportionate amounts set by the office. Notice of the
proportionate amounts shall be given to all governing units involved.

(3) A city or county
primarily responsible for the operation of a jail or jails may create a
department of corrections to be in charge of such jail and of all persons
confined therein by law, subject to the authority of the governing unit. If
such department is created, it shall have charge of jails and persons confined
therein. If no such department of corrections is created, the chief law
enforcement officer of the city or county primarily responsible for the
operation of said jail shall have charge of the jail and of all persons
confined therein.

Sec. 4. RCW 70.48.180 and 1983 c
165 s 37 are each amended to read as follows:

Counties may acquire,
build, operate, and maintain or contract with a private jail contractor
under section 1 of this act to build, lease, operate, and maintain holding,
detention, special detention, and correctional facilities as defined in RCW
70.48.020 at any place designated by the county legislative authority within
the territorial limits of the county. The facilities shall comply with chapter
70.48 RCW and the rules adopted thereunder.

Sec. 5. RCW 70.48.190 and 1983 c
165 s 38 are each amended to read as follows:

Cities and towns may
acquire, build, operate, and maintain or contract with a private jail
contractor under section 1 of this act to build, lease, operate, and maintain
holding, detention, special detention, and correctional facilities as defined
in RCW 70.48.020 at any place within the territorial limits of the county in
which the city or town is situated, as may be selected by the legislative
authority of the municipality. The facilities comply with the provisions of
chapter 70.48 RCW and rules adopted thereunder.

Sec. 6. RCW 70.48.220 and 1979
ex.s. c 232 s 19 are each amended to read as follows:

A person
convicted of an offense punishable by imprisonment in a city or county jail may
be confined in the jail of any city ((or)), county, or private
jail contractor contracting with the prosecuting city or county for jail
services.

---
END ---