BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF
WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1. RCW 90.14.043 and 1985 c
435 s 1 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) Notwithstanding any
time restrictions imposed by the provisions of chapter 90.14 RCW, a person may
file a claim pursuant to RCW 90.14.041 if such person obtains a certification
from the pollution control hearings board as provided in this section.

(2) A certification
shall be issued by the pollution control hearings board if, upon petition to
the board, it is shown to the satisfaction of the board that:

(a) Waters of the state
have been applied to beneficial use continuously (with no period of nonuse exceeding
((five)) ten consecutive years) in the case of surface water
beginning not later than June 7, 1917, and in the case of ground water
beginning not later than June 7, 1945, or

(b) Waters of the state
have been applied to beneficial use continuously (with no period of nonuse
exceeding five consecutive years) from the date of entry of a court decree
confirming a water right and any failure to register a claim resulted from a
reasonable misinterpretation of the requirements as they related to such court
decreed rights.

(3) The board shall
have jurisdiction to accept petitions for certification from any person through
September 1, 1985, and not thereafter.

(4) A petition for
certification shall include complete information on the claim pursuant to RCW
90.14.051 (1) through (8), and any such information as the board may require.

(5) The department of
ecology is directed to accept for filing any claim certified by the board as
provided in subsection (2) of this section. The department of ecology, upon
request of the board, may provide assistance to the board pertinent to any
certification petition.

(6) A certification by
the pollution control hearings board or a filing with the department of ecology
of a claim under this section shall not constitute a determination or
confirmation that a water right exists.

(7) The provisions of
RCW 90.14.071 shall have no applicability to certified claims filed pursuant to
this section.

(8) This section shall
have no applicability to ground waters resulting from the operations of
reclamation projects.

Sec. 2. RCW 90.14.140 and 1998 c
258 s 1 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) For the purposes of
RCW 90.14.130 through 90.14.180, "sufficient cause" shall be defined
as the nonuse of all or a portion of the water by the owner of a water right
for a period of ((five)) ten or more consecutive years where such
nonuse occurs as a result of:

(a) Drought, or other
unavailability of water;

(b) Active service in
the armed forces of the United States during military crisis;

(c) Nonvoluntary
service in the armed forces of the United States;

(d) The operation of
legal proceedings;

(e) Federal or state
agency leases of or options to purchase lands or water rights which preclude or
reduce the use of the right by the owner of the water right;

(f) Federal laws
imposing land or water use restrictions either directly or through the
voluntary enrollment of a landowner in a federal program implementing those
laws, or acreage limitations, or production quotas.

(2) Notwithstanding any
other provisions of RCW 90.14.130 through 90.14.180, there shall be no
relinquishment of any water right:

(a) If such right is
claimed for power development purposes under chapter 90.16 RCW and annual
license fees are paid in accordance with chapter 90.16 RCW;

(b) If such right is
used for a standby or reserve water supply to be used in time of drought or
other low flow period so long as withdrawal or diversion facilities are
maintained in good operating condition for the use of such reserve or standby
water supply;

(c) If such right is
claimed for a determined future development to take place either within fifteen
years of July 1, 1967, or the most recent beneficial use of the water right,
whichever date is later;

(d) If such right is
claimed for municipal water supply purposes under chapter 90.03 RCW;

(e) If such waters are
not subject to appropriation under the applicable provisions of RCW 90.40.030;
or

(f) If
such right or portion of the right is leased to another person for use on land
other than the land to which the right is appurtenant as long as the lessee
makes beneficial use of the right in accordance with this chapter and a
transfer or change of the right has been approved by the department in
accordance with RCW 90.03.380, 90.03.383, 90.03.390, or 90.44.100.

Sec. 3. RCW 90.14.160 and 1981 c
291 s 1 are each amended to read as follows:

Any person entitled to
divert or withdraw waters of the state through any appropriation authorized by
enactments of the legislature prior to enactment of chapter 117, Laws of 1917,
or by custom, or by general adjudication, who abandons the same, or who voluntarily
fails, without sufficient cause, to beneficially use all or any part of said
right to divert or withdraw for any period of ((five)) ten
successive years after July 1, 1967, shall relinquish such right or portion
thereof, and said right or portion thereof shall revert to the state, and the
waters affected by said right shall become available for appropriation in
accordance with RCW 90.03.250.

Sec. 4. RCW 90.14.170 and 1967 c
233 s 17 are each amended to read as follows:

Any person entitled to
divert or withdraw waters of the state by virtue of his ownership of land
abutting a stream, lake, or watercourse, who abandons the same, or who
voluntarily fails, without sufficient cause, to beneficially use all or any
part of said right to withdraw or divert said water for any period of ((five))
ten successive years after July 1, 1967, shall relinquish such right or
portion thereof, and such right or portion thereof shall revert to the state,
and the waters affected by said right shall become available for appropriation
in accordance with the provisions of RCW 90.03.250.

Sec. 5. RCW 90.14.180 and 1987 c
109 s 101 are each amended to read as follows:

Any person
hereafter entitled to divert or withdraw waters of the state through an
appropriation authorized under RCW 90.03.330, 90.44.080, or 90.44.090 who
abandons the same, or who voluntarily fails, without sufficient cause, to
beneficially use all or any part of said right to withdraw for any period of ((five))
ten successive years shall relinquish such right or portion thereof, and
such right or portion thereof shall revert to the state, and the waters
affected by said right shall become available for appropriation in accordance
with RCW 90.03.250. All certificates hereafter issued by the department of
ecology pursuant to RCW 90.03.330 shall expressly incorporate this section by
reference.

---
END ---