BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF
WASHINGTON:

_5 NEW SECTION. Sec. 1. A new section is
added to chapter 89.08

_6 RCW to read as follows:

_7 Anything included in cooperator files of a
conservation

_8 district is exempt from public disclosure under chapter
42.17 RCW.

‑‑‑ END ‑‑‑

p. 1 HB
1771