BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF
WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1. RCW 46.61.687 and 2000 c
190 s 2 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) Whenever a child
who is less than sixteen years of age is being transported in a motor vehicle
that is in operation and that is required by RCW 46.37.510 to be equipped with
a safety belt system in a passenger seating position, the driver of the vehicle
shall keep the child properly restrained as follows:

(a) If the child is
less than ((six)) eight years old ((and/or sixty)) and
eighty pounds and the passenger seating position equipped with a safety
belt system allows sufficient space for installation, then the child will be
restrained in a child restraint system that complies with standards of the
United States department of transportation and that is secured in the vehicle
in accordance with instructions of the manufacturer of the child restraint
system;

(b) If the child is
less than one year of age or weighs less than twenty pounds, the child shall be
properly restrained in a rear-facing infant seat;

(c) If the child is
more than one but less than four years of age or weighs less than forty pounds
but at least twenty pounds, the child shall be properly restrained in a forward
facing child safety seat restraint system;

(d) If the child is
less than ((six)) eight but at least four years of age or weighs
less than ((sixty)) eighty pounds but at least forty pounds, the
child shall be properly restrained in a child booster seat;

(e) If the child is ((six))
eight years of age or older or weighs more than ((sixty)) eighty
pounds or is over four feet nine inches tall, the child shall be
properly restrained with the motor vehicle's safety belt properly adjusted and
fastened around the child's body or an appropriately fitting booster seat; and

(f) Enforcement of (a)
through (e) of this subsection is subject to a visual inspection by law
enforcement to determine if the child restraint system in use is appropriate
for the child's individual height, weight, and age. The visual inspection for
usage of a forward facing child safety seat must ensure that the seat in use is
equipped with a ((four-point)) shoulder harness system. The visual
inspection for usage of a booster seat must ensure that the seat belt properly
fits across the child's lap and the shoulder strap crosses the center of the
child's chest. The visual inspection for the usage of a seat belt by a child
must ensure that the lap belt properly fits across the child's lap and the
shoulder strap crosses the center of the child's chest. In determining violations,
consideration to the above criteria must be given in conjunction with the
provisions of (a) through (e) of this subsection. The driver of a vehicle
transporting a child who is under the age of ((six)) eight years
old or weighs less than ((sixty)) eighty pounds, when the vehicle
is equipped with a passenger side air bag supplemental restraint system, and
the air bag system is activated, shall transport the child in the back seat
positions in the vehicle where it is practical to do so.

(2) A person violating
subsection (1)(a) through (e) of this section may be issued a notice of traffic
infraction under chapter 46.63 RCW. If the person to whom the notice was
issued presents proof of acquisition of an approved child passenger restraint
system or a child booster seat, as appropriate, within seven days to the
jurisdiction issuing the notice and the person has not previously had a
violation of this section dismissed, the jurisdiction shall dismiss the notice
of traffic infraction.

(3) Failure to comply with
the requirements of this section shall not constitute negligence by a parent or
legal guardian; nor shall failure to use a child restraint system be admissible
as evidence of negligence in any civil action.

(4) This section does
not apply to: (a) For hire vehicles, (b) vehicles designed to transport
sixteen or less passengers, including the driver, operated by auto
transportation companies, as defined in RCW 81.68.010, (c) vehicles providing
customer shuttle service between parking, convention, and hotel facilities, and
airport terminals, and (d) school buses.

(5) As used in this
section "child booster seat" means a child passenger restraint system
that meets the Federal Motor Vehicle Safety Standards set forth in 49 C.F.R.
571.213 that is designed to elevate a child to properly sit in a federally
approved lap/shoulder belt system.

(6) The requirements of
subsection (1)(a) through (e) of this section do not apply in any seating
position where there is only a lap belt available and the child weighs more
than forty pounds.

(7) A person,
including but not limited to a volunteer provider of services, who without
compensation, renders inspection, adjustment, or educational services regarding
child passenger restraint systems is not liable for civil damages from any act
or omission in rendering the services, other than acts or omissions
constituting gross negligence or willful or wanton misconduct.

Sec. 2. RCW 46.61.688 and 2000 c
190 s 3 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) For the purposes of
this section, the term "motor vehicle" includes:

(a) "Buses,"
meaning motor vehicles with motive power, except trailers, designed to carry
more than ten passengers;

(b) "Multipurpose
passenger vehicles," meaning motor vehicles with motive power, except
trailers, designed to carry ten persons or less that are constructed either on
a truck chassis or with special features for occasional off-road operation;

(c) "Passenger
cars," meaning motor vehicles with motive power, except multipurpose
passenger vehicles, motorcycles, or trailers, designed for carrying ten
passengers or less; and

(d) "Trucks,"
meaning motor vehicles with motive power, except trailers, designed primarily
for the transportation of property.

(2) This section only
applies to motor vehicles that meet the manual seat belt safety standards as
set forth in federal motor vehicle safety standard 208. This section does not
apply to a vehicle occupant for whom no safety belt is available when all
designated seating positions as required by federal motor vehicle safety
standard 208 are occupied.

(3) Every person
sixteen years of age or older operating or riding in a motor vehicle shall wear
the safety belt assembly in a properly adjusted and securely fastened manner.

(4) No person may
operate a motor vehicle unless all child passengers under the age of sixteen
years are either: (a) Wearing a safety belt assembly or (b) are securely
fastened into an approved child restraint device.

(5) A person violating
this section shall be issued a notice of traffic infraction under chapter 46.63
RCW. A finding that a person has committed a traffic infraction under this
section shall be contained in the driver's abstract but shall not be available
to insurance companies or employers.

(6) Failure to comply
with the requirements of this section does not constitute negligence, nor may
failure to wear a safety belt assembly be admissible as evidence of negligence
in any civil action.

(7) Except for
subsection (4)(((b))) of this section, which must be enforced as a
primary action, enforcement of this section by law enforcement officers may be
accomplished only as a secondary action when a driver of a motor vehicle has
been detained for a suspected violation of Title 46 RCW or an equivalent local
ordinance or some other offense.

(8) This section does
not apply to an operator or passenger who possesses written verification from a
licensed physician that the operator or passenger is unable to wear a safety
belt for physical or medical reasons.

(9) The state patrol
may adopt rules exempting operators or occupants of farm vehicles, construction
equipment, and vehicles that are required to make frequent stops from the
requirement of wearing safety belts.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 3. This act takes effect
July 1, 2002.

---
END ---