BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF
WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1. RCW 90.64.030 and 1998 c
262 s 11 are each amended to read as follows:

(1)(a) Under the
inspection program established in RCW 90.64.023, the department may investigate
a dairy farm to determine whether the operation is discharging pollutants or
has a record of discharging pollutants into surface or ground waters of the
state.

(b) Prior to the
conclusion of the investigation, if the department determines the dairy farm is
discharging pollutants, the dairy producer will be provided an opportunity to
request:

(i) That an
additional water sample test be conducted to confirm the initial findings of
the department; and

(ii) When fecal
coliform bacteria levels are found to be in violation of chapter 90.48 RCW,
chapter 173-201A WAC, or the federal clean water act, that the department
determine the genetic fingerprint of the source of the violation through
microbial source tracking using DNA ribotyping or other identification method
agreed to by the dairy producer and the department. If the department
determines the source of the violation is something other than dairy nutrients,
no corrective action by the dairy farm will be required under this act.

(c) Upon
concluding an investigation, the department shall make a written report of its
findings, including the results of any water quality measurements, photographs,
or other pertinent information, and provide a copy of the report to the dairy
producer within twenty days of the investigation.

(2) The department
shall investigate a written complaint filed with the department within three
working days and shall make a written report of its findings including the
results of any water quality measurements, photographs, or other pertinent
information. A copy of the findings shall be provided to the dairy producer
subject to the complaint within twenty days. Only findings of violations shall
be entered into the data base identified in RCW 90.64.130.

(3) A dairy farm that
is determined to be a significant contributor of pollution based on actual
water quality tests, photographs, or other pertinent information is subject to
the provisions of this chapter and to the enforcement provisions of chapters
43.05 and 90.48 RCW, including civil penalties levied under RCW 90.48.144.

(4) If the department
determines that an unresolved water quality problem from a dairy farm requires
immediate corrective action, the department shall notify the producer and the
district in which the problem is located. When corrective actions are required
to address such unresolved water quality problems, the department shall provide
copies of all final dairy farm inspection reports and documentation of all
formal regulatory and enforcement actions taken by the department against that
particular dairy farm to the local conservation district and to the appropriate
dairy farm within twenty days.

(5) For a violation of
water quality laws that is a first offense for a dairy producer, the penalty
may be waived to allow the producer to come into compliance with water quality
laws. The department shall record all legitimate violations and subsequent
enforcement actions.

(6) A discharge,
including a storm water discharge, to surface waters of the state shall not be
considered a violation of this chapter, chapter 90.48 RCW, or chapter 173-201A
WAC, and shall therefore not be enforceable by the department of ecology or a
third party, if at the time of the discharge, a violation is not occurring
under RCW 90.64.010(18). In addition, a dairy producer shall not be held
liable for violations of this chapter, chapter 90.48 RCW, chapter 173-201A WAC,
or the federal clean water act due to the discharge of dairy nutrients to
waters of the state resulting from spreading these materials on lands other
than where the nutrients were generated, when the nutrients are spread by
persons other than the dairy producer or the dairy producer's agent.

(7) As provided under
RCW 7.48.305, agricultural activities associated with the management of dairy
nutrients are presumed to be reasonable and shall not be found to constitute a
nuisance unless the activity has a substantial adverse effect on public health
and safety.

(8) This section
specifically acknowledges that if a holder of a general or individual national
pollutant discharge elimination system permit complies with the permit and the
dairy nutrient management plan conditions for appropriate land application
practices, the permit provides compliance with the federal clean water act and
acts as a shield against citizen or agency enforcement for any additions of
pollutants to waters of the state or of the United States as authorized by the
permit.

(9) A
dairy producer who fails to have an approved dairy nutrient management plan by
July 1, 2002, or a certified dairy nutrient management plan by December 31,
2003, and for which no appeals have been filed with the pollution control
hearings board, is in violation of this chapter. Each month beyond these
deadlines that a dairy producer is out of compliance with the requirement for
either plan approval or plan certification shall be considered separate
violations of chapter 90.64 RCW that may be subject to penalties. Such
penalties may not exceed one hundred dollars per month for each violation up to
a combined total of five thousand dollars. Failure to register as required in
RCW 90.64.017 shall subject a dairy producer to a maximum penalty of one
hundred dollars. Penalties shall be levied by the department.

--- END ---