BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF
WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec.
1. A new section is added
to chapter 41.05 RCW to read as follows:

(1) The administrator
must establish a senior pharmacy assistance program in accordance with the
provisions of this section. The senior pharmacy assistance program provides
financial assistance to eligible individuals for the purchase of prescription
drugs.

(2) Individuals
sixty-five years old and older with a household income above the eligibility
standard for medicaid categorically needy coverage and below three hundred
percent of the federal poverty guidelines are eligible for the senior pharmacy
assistance program if they:

(a) Do not qualify for
any other local, state medicaid categorically needy program, or federal
prescription drug program;

(b) Are not covered
under any private prescription reimbursement plan;

(c) Have not
voluntarily canceled a local, state, or federal prescription drug program or a
private prescription reimbursement plan within the six months prior to
application for enrollment in the senior pharmacy assistance program;

(d) Pay a coinsurance
amount of ten dollars, for eligible individuals with an income above the
eligibility standard for medicaid categorically needy coverage and up to one
hundred twenty-five percent of the federal poverty guidelines; and

(e) Pay a coinsurance
amount of twenty percent, for eligible individuals with an income above one
hundred twenty-five and up to three hundred percent of the federal poverty
guidelines.

(3) Each eligible
individual may receive a maximum annual drug benefit of one thousand five
hundred dollars.

(4) The administrator
must adopt rules necessary to implement the senior pharmacy assistance program,
including the prescription drugs eligible for reimbursement under the senior
pharmacy assistance program, the amount of the pharmacy dispensing fee,
procedures for limiting enrollment, selecting participating pharmacies, and
establishing a period of open enrollment that may not be less than thirty days,
including an enrollment period for those who become age eligible during the year.

(5) If the
administrator determines that the funds appropriated for the senior pharmacy
assistance program are not sufficient to serve all individuals who qualify for
assistance, the administrator must take those steps necessary to limit program
expenditures to an amount equal to appropriated funds.

(6) The administrator
may contract for the operation of the senior pharmacy assistance program.

(7) When an enrollee
fails to report income or income changes accurately or fails to report
participation in any publicly funded prescription drug plan or coverage under
any private prescription reimbursement plan, the administrator shall have the
authority either to bill the enrollee for the amounts overpaid by the state or
to impose civil penalties of up to two hundred percent of the amount of subsidy
overpaid due to the enrollee incorrectly reporting income. The administrator
shall adopt rules to define the appropriate application of these sanctions and
the processes to implement the sanctions provided in this subsection, within
available resources.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
2. The administrator of the
Washington state health care authority shall design a catastrophic prescription
drug benefit for the senior pharmacy assistance program and present it to the
appropriate committees of the senate and house of representatives no later than
December 15, 2001.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
3. (1) If federal funding
becomes available for senior prescription drug assistance on or before March 1,
2002, it shall be used to fund the provisions of this act, subject to the
provisions and limitations of section 1(5) of this act.

(2) If federal funding
becomes available for prescription drug assistance for individuals without
access to prescription drug coverage or who have access to prescription drug
assistance through state funded programs on or before March 1, 2002, it shall
be appropriated for the purposes specified in the operating budget adopted by
the legislature.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
4. If the state does not
receive federal funding for the purposes of section 3 of this act by March 1,
2002, this act is null and void.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 5. If any provision of this
act or its application to any person or circumstance is held invalid, the
remainder of the act or the application of the provision to other persons or
circumstances is not affected.

---
END ---