BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF
WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1. RCW 84.55.005 and 1997 c
393 s 20 and 1997 c 3 s 201 are each reenacted and amended to read as follows:

As used in this
chapter:

(1)
"Inflation" means the percentage change in the implicit price
deflator for personal consumption expenditures for the United States as
published for the most recent twelve-month period by the bureau of economic
analysis of the federal department of commerce in September of the year before
the taxes are payable;

(2) "Limit
factor" means:

(a) For taxing
districts with a population of less than ten thousand in the calendar year
prior to the assessment year, one hundred ((six)) two percent;

(b) For taxing
districts for which a limit factor is authorized under RCW 84.55.0101, the
lesser of the limit factor authorized under that section or one hundred ((six))
two percent;

(c) For all other
districts, the lesser of one hundred ((six)) two percent or one
hundred percent plus inflation; and

(3) "Regular
property taxes" has the meaning given it in RCW 84.04.140.

Sec. 2. RCW 84.55.0101 and 1997
c 3 s 204 are each amended to read as follows:

Upon a finding of
substantial need, the legislative authority of a taxing district other than the
state may provide for the use of a limit factor under this chapter of one
hundred ((six)) two percent or less. In districts with
legislative authorities of four members or less, two-thirds of the members must
approve an ordinance or resolution under this section. In districts with more
than four members, a majority plus one vote must approve an ordinance or
resolution under this section. The new limit factor shall be effective for
taxes collected in the following year only.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 3. RCW 84.55.092 (Protection of future levy
capacity) and 1998 c 16 s 3, 1988 c 274 s 4, & 1986 c 107 s 3 are each
repealed.

---
END ---