BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF
WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1. RCW 9.96A.020 and 1999 c
16 s 1 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) Subject to the
exceptions in subsections (3) ((and (4))) through (5) of this
section, and unless there is another provision of law to the contrary, a person
is not disqualified from employment by the state of Washington or any of its
counties, cities, towns, municipal corporations, or quasi-municipal
corporations, nor is a person disqualified to practice, pursue or engage in any
occupation, trade, vocation, or business for which a license, permit,
certificate or registration is required to be issued by the state of Washington
or any of its counties, cities, towns, municipal corporations, or quasi-municipal
corporations solely because of a prior conviction of a felony. However, this
section does not preclude the fact of any prior conviction of a crime from
being considered.

(2) A person may be
denied employment by the state of Washington or any of its counties, cities,
towns, municipal corporations, or quasi-municipal corporations, or a person may
be denied a license, permit, certificate or registration to pursue, practice or
engage in an occupation, trade, vocation, or business by reason of the prior
conviction of a felony if the felony for which he or she was convicted directly
relates to the position of employment sought or to the specific occupation,
trade, vocation, or business for which the license, permit, certificate or
registration is sought, and the time elapsed since the conviction is less than
ten years. However, for positions in the county treasurer's office, a person
may be disqualified from employment because of a prior guilty plea or
conviction of a felony involving embezzlement or theft, even if the time
elapsed since the guilty plea or conviction is ten years or more.

(3) A person is
disqualified for any certificate required or authorized under chapters 28A.405
or 28A.410 RCW, because of a prior guilty plea or the conviction of a felony
involving sexual exploitation of a child under chapter 9.68A RCW, sexual
offenses under chapter 9A.44 RCW where a minor is the victim, promoting
prostitution of a minor under chapter 9A.88 RCW, or a violation of similar laws
of another jurisdiction, even if the time elapsed since the guilty plea or
conviction is ten years or more.

(4) A person is
disqualified from employment by school districts, educational service
districts, and their contractors hiring employees who will have regularly
scheduled unsupervised access to children, because of a prior guilty plea or
conviction of a felony involving sexual exploitation of a child under chapter
9.68A RCW, sexual offenses under chapter 9A.44 RCW where a minor is the victim,
promoting prostitution of a minor under chapter 9A.88 RCW, or a violation of
similar laws of another jurisdiction, even if the time elapsed since the guilty
plea or conviction is ten years or more.

(5) The department
of social and health services is exempt from the requirements of subsections
(1) and (2) of this section when employing a person who, in the course of his
or her employment, will or may have unsupervised access to children, juveniles
as defined in RCW 72.05.020, vulnerable adults as defined in RCW 43.20A.020, or
individuals with developmental disabilities or mental illness.

(6) Subsections
(3) and (4) of this section only apply to a person applying for a certificate
or for employment on or after July 25, 1993.

Sec. 2. RCW 41.06.475 and 1993 c
281 s 38 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) The
Washington personnel resources board shall adopt rules, consistent with RCW
43.20A.710, and in cooperation with the secretary of social and health
services, ((for)) concerning the background investigation of ((persons
being considered for state employment in positions directly responsible for the
supervision, care, or treatment of children or developmentally disabled persons))
current employees or applicants seeking or being considered for any position
that will or may allow unsupervised access, as defined in RCW 43.43.830, to
children, juveniles, vulnerable adults, or individuals with developmental
disabilities or mental illness.

(2) The rules shall:

(a) Specify that the
department of social and health services shall conduct a background
investigation, including a conviction record check through the Washington state
patrol in accordance with chapter 10.97 RCW, on all current department of
social and health services' employees, volunteers and students, and all applicants
who are being considered for any existing or new position under this act;

(b) Require that the
background investigation conducted on applicants or current department of
social and health services' employees be equivalent to the investigation required
to be conducted for any service provider, entity, agency, facility,
organization or business, their staff, and volunteers and students. The
secretary of social and health services shall use the information solely to
determine the character, suitability, and competence of the applicant to have
unsupervised access to children, juveniles, vulnerable adults, or individuals
with developmental disabilities or mental illness;

(c) Require that the
disqualification of an applicant or current department of social and health
services' employee from unsupervised access to children, juveniles, vulnerable
adults, or individuals with developmental disabilities or mental illness is
based on a standard equivalent to the disqualification requirements for service
providers who are not department of social and health services' employees;

(d) Specify that one
year from the effective date of this act, the department of social and health
services will initiate background check investigations for all current
department of social and health services' employees, students, and volunteers
who hold positions covered by this section and have not previously had a
department of social and health services' background check investigation under
this act;

(e) Specify that any
current employee or applicant seeking or being considered for employment with
the department of social and health services in a position covered under this
act who has resided in the state less than three years prior to the application
for the position will be required to be fingerprinted for the purpose of
conducting a background check through the federal bureau of investigation;

(f) Describe the
actions the department of social and health services will take if, as a result
of a background investigation, a current permanent employee is not eligible to
have unsupervised access to children, juveniles, vulnerable adults, or
individuals with developmental disabilities or mental illness;

(g) Ensure that if
an employee's position is changed due to a reduction in force or
reorganization, and the new position includes unsupervised access to children,
juveniles, vulnerable adults, or individuals with developmental disabilities or
mental illness, the department of social and health services will conduct a
background investigation unless a background investigation has previously been
conducted in accordance with this section;

(h) Require that
information obtained from a background investigation will be private in
accordance with chapter 10.97 RCW, Washington state criminal records privacy
act, and be handled under the confidentiality requirements of the Washington
state patrol and the federal bureau of investigation; and

(i) Specify that
department of social and health services' employees who work for more than one
administration, or those that transfer from one administration to another, will
be responsible to meet the background investigation standards of the
administration with the more rigorous requirement.

Sec. 3. RCW 43.20A.020 and 1987
c 283 s 1 are each amended to read as follows:

As used in this
chapter, unless the context indicates otherwise:

(1) "Applicant"
means applicant as defined in RCW 43.43.830.

(2) "Background
investigation" means a review of conviction records, and may include:
Review of in-state and/or out-of-state disciplinary board final decisions;
civil adjudication records; records of protection orders issued against the
applicant; department findings; license status; and pending charges.

(3)
"Department" means the department of social and health services.

(((2)
"Secretary" means the secretary of the department of social and
health services.

(3))) (4) "Department finding" means a
determination by the department that an individual has physically, sexually, or
verbally abused, neglected, or exploited a child, juvenile, vulnerable adult,
or individual with a developmental disability or mental illness.

(5) "Deputy
secretary" means the deputy secretary of the department of social and
health services.

(((4))) (6)
"Disciplinary board final decision" means the same as defined in RCW
43.43.830 and includes the following additional professions:

(a) Physicians'
assistant;

(b) Nursing
assistant registered or certified;

(c) Occupational
therapist;

(d) Recreational
therapist and certified therapeutic specialists;

(e) Speech
therapist; and

(f) Forensic
therapist;

(7)
"Juvenile" means a person under the age of twenty-one who has been
sentenced to a term of confinement under the supervision of the department
under RCW 13.40.185.

(8) "License
status" means the current and past history of an individual's professional
license, certification, or registration or the current and past history of a
license issued to a service provider, organization, agency, or other entity to
provide care or service to children, juveniles, vulnerable adults, or
individuals with developmental disabilities or mental illness.

(9)
"Overpayment" means any department payment or department benefit to a
recipient or to a vendor in excess of that to which the recipient or vendor is
entitled by law, rule, or contract, including amounts in dispute pending
resolution.

(((5))) (10)
"Secretary" means the secretary of the department of social and
health services.

(11)
"Vendor" means an entity that provides goods or services to or for
clientele of the department and that controls operational decisions.

(12)
"Vulnerable adult, or an individual with a developmental disability or
mental illness" means the same as those terms are defined in RCW 43.43.830
and chapter 74.34 RCW, except for agencies certified under chapter 70.96A RCW,
vulnerable adult means individuals admitted for detoxification treatment or who
are involuntarily committed under chapter 70.96A RCW.

Sec. 4. RCW 43.20A.710 and 2000
c 87 s 2 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) The secretary shall
((investigate the conviction records, pending charges or disciplinary board
final decisions of)) conduct background investigations for:

(a) ((Persons being
considered for state employment in positions directly responsible for the
supervision, care, or treatment of)) Any current employee or applicant
seeking or being considered for any position with the department who will or
may have unsupervised access to children, juveniles, vulnerable
adults, or individuals with mental illness or developmental disabilities according
to rules adopted under RCW 41.06.475;

(b) ((Persons being
considered for state employment in positions involving unsupervised access to
vulnerable adults)) Any current employee or applicant seeking or being
considered for any position with the department who will or may have unsupervised
access to children, juveniles, vulnerable adults, or individuals with
developmental disabilities or mental illness to conduct comprehensive
assessments, financial eligibility determinations, licensing and certification
activities, investigations, surveys, or case management; or for state positions
otherwise required by federal law to meet employment standards according to
rules adopted under RCW 41.06.475;

(c) Individual
providers who are paid by the state and providers who are paid by home care
agencies to provide in-home services involving unsupervised access to persons
with physical, mental, or developmental disabilities or mental illness, or to
vulnerable adults as defined in chapter 74.34 RCW, including but not limited to
services provided under chapter 74.39 or 74.39A RCW; and

(d) Individuals or
businesses or organizations for the care, supervision, case management, or
treatment of children, developmentally disabled persons, or vulnerable adults,
including but not limited to services contracted for under chapter 18.20,
18.48, 70.127, 70.128, 72.36, or 74.39A RCW or Title 71A RCW.

(2) The investigation
may include an examination of state and national criminal identification data.
The secretary shall use the information solely ((for the purpose of
determining)) to determine the character, suitability, and
competence of ((these)) applicants to have unsupervised access to
children, juveniles, vulnerable adults, or individuals with developmental
disabilities or mental illness.

(3) An individual provider
or home care agency provider who has resided in the state less than three years
before applying for employment involving unsupervised access to a vulnerable
adult as defined in chapter 74.34 RCW must be fingerprinted for the purpose of
investigating conviction records both through the Washington state patrol and
the federal bureau of investigation. This subsection applies only with respect
to the provision of in-home services funded by medicaid personal care under RCW
74.09.520, community options program entry system waiver services under RCW
74.39A.030, or chore services under RCW 74.39A.110. However, this subsection
does not supersede RCW 74.15.030(2)(b).

(4) An individual
provider or home care agency provider hired to provide in-home care for and having
unsupervised access to a vulnerable adult as defined in chapter 74.34 RCW must
have no conviction for a disqualifying crime under RCW 43.43.830 and
43.43.842. An individual or home care agency provider must also have no
conviction for a crime relating to drugs as defined in RCW 43.43.830. This
subsection applies only with respect to the provision of in-home services
funded by medicaid personal care under RCW 74.09.520, community options program
entry system waiver services under RCW 74.39A.030, or chore services under RCW
74.39A.110.

(5) The secretary shall
provide the results of the background check on individual providers to the
persons hiring them or to their legal guardians, if any, for their
determination of the character, suitability, and competence of the applicants.
If the person elects to hire or retain an individual provider after receiving
notice from the department that the applicant has a conviction for an offense
that would disqualify the applicant from having unsupervised access to persons
with physical, mental, or developmental disabilities or mental illness, or to
vulnerable adults as defined in chapter 74.34 RCW, then the secretary shall
deny payment for any subsequent services rendered by the disqualified
individual provider.

(6) Criminal justice
agencies shall provide the secretary such information as they may have and that
the secretary may require for such purpose.

Sec. 5. RCW 43.43.830 and 1999 c
45 s 5 are each amended to read as follows:

Unless the context
clearly requires otherwise, the definitions in this section apply throughout
RCW 43.43.830 through ((43.43.840)) 43.43.842.

(1)
"Applicant" means:

(a) Any prospective
employee or student who will or may have unsupervised access to children
under sixteen years of age ((or developmentally disabled persons or)),
juveniles, vulnerable adults, or individuals with developmental
disabilities or mental illness during the course of his or her employment
or involvement with the business or organization;

(b) Any prospective
volunteer who will or may have regularly scheduled unsupervised access
to children under sixteen years of age, ((developmentally disabled persons,
or)) juveniles, vulnerable adults, or individuals with
developmental disabilities or mental illness during the course of his or
her employment or involvement with the business or organization under
circumstances where such access will or may involve groups of (i) five or fewer
children under twelve years of age, (ii) three or fewer children between twelve
and sixteen years of age, (iii) developmentally disabled persons, or (iv)
vulnerable adults; or

(c) Any prospective
adoptive parent, as defined in RCW 26.33.020.

(2) "Business or
organization" means a business or organization licensed in this state, any
agency of the state, or other governmental entity, that educates, trains,
treats, supervises, houses, or provides recreation to ((developmentally
disabled persons,)) vulnerable adults, ((or)) individuals with
developmental disabilities or mental illness, children under sixteen years
of age, or juveniles, including but not limited to public housing
authorities, school districts, and educational service districts.

(3) "Civil
adjudication" means a specific court finding of sexual abuse or exploitation
or physical abuse in a dependency action under RCW 13.34.040 or in a domestic
relations action under Title 26 RCW. In the case of vulnerable adults, civil
adjudication means a specific court finding of abuse or financial exploitation
in a protection proceeding under chapter 74.34 RCW. It does not include
administrative proceedings. The term "civil adjudication" is further
limited to court findings that identify as the perpetrator of the abuse a named
individual, over the age of eighteen years, who was a party to the dependency
or dissolution proceeding or was a respondent in a protection proceeding in
which the finding was made and who contested the allegation of abuse or
exploitation.

(4) "Conviction
record" means "conviction record" information as defined in RCW
10.97.030(3) relating to a crime against children or other persons committed by
either an adult or a juvenile. It does not include a conviction for an offense
that has been the subject of an expungement, pardon, annulment, certificate of
rehabilitation, or other equivalent procedure based on a finding of the
rehabilitation of the person convicted, or a conviction that has been the
subject of a pardon, annulment, or other equivalent procedure based on a
finding of innocence. It does include convictions for offenses for which the
defendant received a deferred or suspended sentence, unless the record has been
expunged according to law.

(5) "Crime against
children or other persons" means a conviction of any of the following
offenses: Aggravated murder; first or second degree murder; first or second
degree kidnaping; first, second, or third degree assault; first, second, or
third degree assault of a child; first, second, or third degree rape; first,
second, or third degree rape of a child; first or second degree robbery; first
degree arson; first degree burglary; first or second degree manslaughter; first
or second degree extortion; indecent liberties; incest; vehicular homicide;
first degree promoting prostitution; communication with a minor; unlawful
imprisonment; simple assault; sexual exploitation of minors; first or second
degree criminal mistreatment; child abuse or neglect as defined in RCW
26.44.020; first or second degree custodial interference; first or second degree
custodial sexual misconduct; malicious harassment; first, second, or third
degree child molestation; first or second degree sexual misconduct with a
minor; patronizing a juvenile prostitute; child abandonment; promoting
pornography; selling or distributing erotic material to a minor; custodial
assault; violation of child abuse restraining order; child buying or selling;
prostitution; felony indecent exposure; criminal abandonment; or any of these
crimes as they may be renamed in the future.

(6) "Crimes
relating to drugs" means a conviction of a crime to manufacture, delivery,
or possession with intent to manufacture or deliver a controlled substance.

(7) "Crimes
relating to financial exploitation" means a conviction for first, second,
or third degree extortion; first, second, or third degree theft; first or
second degree robbery; forgery; or any of these crimes as they may be renamed
in the future.

(8) "Disciplinary
board final decision" means any final decision issued by a disciplining
authority under chapter 18.130 RCW or the secretary of the department of health
for the following businesses or professions:

(a) Chiropractic;

(b) Dentistry;

(c) Dental hygiene;

(d) Massage;

(e) Midwifery;

(f) Naturopathy;

(g) Osteopathic
medicine and surgery;

(h) Physical therapy;

(i) Physicians;

(j) Practical nursing;

(k) Registered nursing;
and

(l) Psychology.

"Disciplinary
board final decision," for real estate brokers and salespersons, means any
final decision issued by the director of the department of licensing for real
estate brokers and salespersons.

(9)
"Unsupervised" means not in the presence of:

(a) Another employee or
volunteer from the same business or organization as the applicant; or

(b) Any relative or
guardian of any of the children or ((developmentally disabled persons)) individuals
with developmental disabilities or vulnerable adults to which the applicant
has access during the course of his or her employment or involvement with the
business or organization.

(10) "Vulnerable
adult" means "vulnerable adult" as defined in chapter 74.34 RCW,
except that for the purposes of requesting and receiving background checks
pursuant to RCW 43.43.832, it shall also include adults of any age who lack the
functional, mental, or physical ability to care for themselves.

(11) "Financial
exploitation" means the illegal or improper use of a vulnerable adult or
that adult's resources for another person's profit or advantage.

(12) "Agency"
means any person, firm, partnership, association, corporation, or facility
which receives, provides services to, houses, or otherwise cares for
vulnerable adults, children, juveniles, or individuals with developmental
disabilities or mental illness.

(13)
"Juvenile" means juvenile as defined in RCW 43.20A.020.

Sec. 6. RCW 43.43.832 and 2000 c
87 s 1 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) The legislature
finds that businesses and organizations providing services to children, ((developmentally
disabled persons, and)) juveniles, vulnerable adults, or
individuals with developmental disabilities or mental illness need adequate
information to determine which employees or licensees to hire or engage. The
legislature further finds that many ((developmentally disabled))
individuals ((and)) with developmental disabilities or mental
illness, or other vulnerable adults desire to hire their own employees
directly and also need adequate information to determine which employees or
licensees to hire or engage. Therefore, the Washington state patrol criminal
identification system shall disclose, upon the request of a business or
organization as defined in RCW 43.43.830, ((a developmentally disabled
person)) an individual with a developmental disability or mental illness,
or a vulnerable adult as defined in RCW 43.43.830 or his or her guardian, an
applicant's record for convictions of offenses against children or other
persons, convictions for crimes relating to financial exploitation, but only if
the victim was a vulnerable adult, adjudications of child abuse in a civil
action, the issuance of a protection order against the respondent under chapter
74.34 RCW, and disciplinary board final decisions and any subsequent criminal
charges associated with the conduct that is the subject of the disciplinary
board final decision.

(2) The legislature
also finds that the state board of education may request of the Washington
state patrol criminal identification system information regarding a certificate
applicant's record for convictions under subsection (1) of this section.

(3) The legislature
also finds that law enforcement agencies, the office of the attorney general,
prosecuting authorities, and the department of social and health services may
request this same information to aid in the investigation and prosecution of
child, developmentally disabled person, and vulnerable adult abuse cases and to
protect children and adults from further incidents of abuse.

(4) The legislature
further finds that the department of social and health services must ((consider
the information listed in subsection (1) of this section in the following
circumstances)) conduct a background investigation in accordance with
RCW 43.20A.710 and follow the rules adopted under RCW 41.06.475 when:

(a) ((When)) Considering
((persons)) any current employee or other applicant for state
employment in ((positions directly responsible for the supervision, care, or
treatment of)) any position that will or may have unsupervised access to
children, juveniles, vulnerable adults, or individuals with mental illness
or developmental disabilities; and

(b) ((When)) Considering
((persons)) any current employee or other applicant for any
state position((s involving)) that will or may allow unsupervised
access to children, juveniles, vulnerable adults, or individuals with
developmental disabilities or mental illness to conduct comprehensive
assessments, financial eligibility determinations, licensing and certification
activities, investigations, surveys, or case management; or for state positions
otherwise required by federal law to meet employment standards((;)).

(((c))) (5)
The department of social and health services must consider the information
listed in subsection (1) of this section when:

(a) Licensing
agencies or facilities with individuals in positions directly responsible for
the care, supervision, or treatment of children, ((developmentally disabled
persons)) juveniles, ((or)) vulnerable adults, ((including
but not limited to agencies or facilities licensed under chapter 74.15 or 18.51
RCW)) or individuals with developmental disabilities or mental illness;

(((d) When)) (b)
Contracting with individuals or businesses or organizations for the care,
supervision, case management, or treatment of children, ((developmentally
disabled persons)) juveniles, ((or)) vulnerable adults, ((including
but not limited to services contracted for under chapter 18.20, 18.48, 70.127,
70.128, 72.36, or 74.39A RCW or Title 71A RCW)) or individuals with
developmental disabilities or mental illness; and

(((e) When)) (c)
Individual providers are paid by the state or providers are paid by home
care agencies to provide in-home services involving unsupervised access to
persons with physical, mental, or developmental disabilities or mental illness,
or to vulnerable adults as defined in ((chapter 74.34)) RCW 43.43.830,
including but not limited to services provided under chapter 74.39 or 74.39A
RCW.

(((5))) (6)
Whenever a state conviction record check is required by state law, persons may
be employed or engaged as volunteers or independent contractors on a
conditional basis pending completion of the state background investigation.
Whenever a national criminal record check through the federal bureau of
investigation is required by state law, a person may be employed or engaged as
a volunteer or independent contractor on a conditional basis pending completion
of the national check.

(7) The
Washington personnel resources board shall adopt rules in accordance with
RCW 41.06.475 to accomplish the purposes of this subsection as it applies
to state employees.

(((6))) (8)(a)
For purposes of facilitating timely access to criminal background information
and to reasonably minimize the number of requests made under this section,
recognizing that certain health care providers change employment frequently,
health care facilities may, upon request from another health care facility,
share copies of completed criminal background inquiry information.

(b) Completed criminal
background inquiry information may be shared by a willing health care facility
only if the following conditions are satisfied: The licensed health care
facility sharing the criminal background inquiry information is reasonably
known to be the person's most recent employer, no more than twelve months has
elapsed from the date the person was last employed at a licensed health care
facility to the date of their current employment application, and the criminal
background information is no more than two years old.

(c) If criminal
background inquiry information is shared, the health care facility employing
the subject of the inquiry must require the applicant to sign a disclosure
statement indicating that there has been no conviction or finding as described
in RCW 43.43.842 since the completion date of the most recent criminal background
inquiry.

(d) Any health care
facility that knows or has reason to believe that an applicant has or may have
a disqualifying conviction or finding as described in RCW 43.43.842, subsequent
to the completion date of their most recent criminal background inquiry, shall
be prohibited from relying on the applicant's previous employer's criminal
background inquiry information. A new criminal background inquiry shall be
requested pursuant to RCW 43.43.830 through 43.43.842.

(e) Health care
facilities that share criminal background inquiry information shall be immune
from any claim of defamation, invasion of privacy, negligence, or any other
claim in connection with any dissemination of this information in accordance
with this subsection.

(f) Health care
facilities shall transmit and receive the criminal background inquiry
information in a manner that reasonably protects the subject's rights to
privacy and confidentiality.

(g) For the purposes of
this subsection, "health care facility" means a nursing home licensed
under chapter 18.51 RCW, a boarding home licensed under chapter 18.20 RCW, or
an adult family home licensed under chapter 70.128 RCW.

(((7))) (9)
If a federal bureau of investigation check is required in addition to the state
background check by the department of social and health services, an applicant
who is not disqualified based on the results of the state background check
shall be eligible for a one hundred twenty day provisional approval to hire,
pending the outcome of the federal bureau of investigation check. The
department may extend the provisional approval until receipt of the federal
bureau of investigation check. If the federal bureau of investigation check
disqualifies an applicant, the department shall notify the requestor that the
provisional approval to hire is withdrawn and the applicant may be terminated.

Sec. 7. RCW 72.05.440 and 1998 c
269 s 16 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) A person shall not
be eligible for an employed or volunteer position within the juvenile
rehabilitation administration or any agency with which it contracts in which
the person may have regular or unsupervised access, as defined in RCW
43.43.830, to juveniles under the jurisdiction of the department of social
and health services or the department of corrections if the person has been
convicted of one or more of the following:

(a) Any felony sex
offense;

(b) Any violent
offense, as defined in RCW 9.94A.030.

(2) Subsection (1) of
this section applies only to persons hired by the department or any of its
contracting agencies after September 1, 1998.

(3) Any person employed
by the juvenile rehabilitation administration, or by any contracting agency,
who may have regular or unsupervised access, as defined in RCW
43.43.830, to juveniles under the jurisdiction of the department or the
department of corrections and who is convicted of an offense set forth in this
section after September 1, 1998, shall report the conviction to his or her supervisor.
The report must be made within seven days of conviction. Failure to report
within seven days of conviction constitutes misconduct under Title 50 RCW.

(4) For purposes of
this section "may have regular access to juveniles" means access for
more than a nominal amount of time.

(5) The department
shall adopt rules to implement this section.

Sec. 8. RCW 72.23.035 and 1989 c
334 s 12 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) In
consultation with law enforcement personnel and other state agencies,
the secretary shall have the power and duty to investigate the ((conviction
record and the protection proceeding record information under chapter 43.43 RCW
of each prospective employee of)) background of any current employee or
applicant, as defined in RCW 43.20A.020, seeking or being considered for any
position that will or may allow unsupervised access, as defined in RCW
43.43.830, to clients residing in a state hospital.

(2) The background
investigation that is conducted must be the same as described in RCW 43.20A.710
and shall meet the rules adopted in accordance with RCW 41.06.475.

Sec. 9. RCW 74.15.030 and 2000 c
162 s 20 and 2000 c 122 s 40 are each reenacted and amended to read as follows:

The secretary shall
have the power and it shall be the secretary's duty:

(1) In consultation
with the children's services advisory committee, and with the advice and
assistance of persons representative of the various type agencies to be
licensed, to designate categories of facilities for which separate or different
requirements shall be developed as may be appropriate whether because of
variations in the ages, sex and other characteristics of persons served,
variations in the purposes and services offered or size or structure of the
agencies to be licensed hereunder, or because of any other factor relevant
thereto;

(2) In consultation
with the children's services advisory committee, and with the advice and
assistance of persons representative of the various type agencies to be
licensed, to adopt and publish minimum requirements for licensing applicable to
each of the various categories of agencies to be licensed.

The minimum
requirements shall be limited to:

(a) The size and
suitability of a facility and the plan of operation for carrying out the
purpose for which an applicant seeks a license;

(b) The character,
suitability, and competence of an agency and other persons associated
with an agency directly responsible for the care and treatment of, or in positions
that will or may allow unsupervised access to, children, expectant mothers,
or ((developmentally disabled persons)) individuals with
developmental disabilities. In consultation with law enforcement
personnel, the secretary shall investigate the conviction record or pending
charges and dependency record information under chapter 43.43 RCW of each
agency and its staff seeking licensure or relicensure. No unfounded allegation
of child abuse or neglect as defined in RCW 26.44.020 may be disclosed to a
child-placing agency, private adoption agency, or any other provider licensed
under this chapter. In order to determine the suitability of applicants for an
agency license, licensees, their employees, and other persons who have
unsupervised access to children in care, and who have not resided in the state
of Washington during the three-year period before being authorized to care for
children shall be fingerprinted. The fingerprints shall be forwarded to the
Washington state patrol and federal bureau of investigation for a criminal
history records check. The fingerprint criminal history records checks will be
at the expense of the licensee except that in the case of a foster family home,
if this expense would work a hardship on the licensee, the department shall pay
the expense. The licensee may not pass this cost on to the employee or
prospective employee, unless the employee is determined to be unsuitable due to
his or her criminal history record. The secretary shall use the information
solely for the purpose of determining eligibility for a license and for
determining the character, suitability, and competence of those persons or
agencies, excluding parents, not required to be licensed who are authorized to
care for children, expectant mothers, and ((developmentally disabled persons))
individuals with developmental disabilities. Criminal justice agencies
shall provide the secretary such information as they may have and that the
secretary may require for such purpose;

(c) The number of
qualified persons required to render the type of care and treatment for which
an agency seeks a license;

(d) The safety,
cleanliness, and general adequacy of the premises to provide for the comfort,
care and well-being of children, expectant mothers, or ((developmentally
disabled persons)) individuals with developmental disabilities;

(e) The provision of
necessary care, including food, clothing, supervision and discipline; physical,
mental and social well-being; and educational, recreational and spiritual
opportunities for those served;

(f) The financial
ability of an agency to comply with minimum requirements established pursuant
to chapter 74.15 RCW and RCW 74.13.031; and

(g) The maintenance of
records pertaining to the admission, progress, health and discharge of persons
served;

(3) To investigate any
person, including relatives by blood or marriage except for parents, for
character, suitability, and competence in the care and treatment of children,
expectant mothers, and ((developmentally disabled persons)) individuals
with developmental disabilities prior to authorizing that person to care
for children, expectant mothers, and ((developmentally disabled persons))
individuals with developmental disabilities. However, if a child is
placed with a relative under RCW 13.34.065 or 13.34.130, and if such relative
appears otherwise suitable and competent to provide care and treatment the
criminal history background check required by this section need not be
completed before placement, but shall be completed as soon as possible after
placement;

(4) On reports of
alleged child abuse and neglect, to investigate agencies in accordance with
chapter 26.44 RCW, including child day-care centers and family day-care homes,
to determine whether the alleged abuse or neglect has occurred, and whether
child protective services or referral to a law enforcement agency is
appropriate;

(5) To issue, revoke,
or deny licenses to agencies pursuant to chapter 74.15 RCW and RCW 74.13.031.
Licenses shall specify the category of care which an agency is authorized to
render and the ages, sex and number of persons to be served;

(6) To prescribe the
procedures and the form and contents of reports necessary for the
administration of chapter 74.15 RCW and RCW 74.13.031 and to require regular
reports from each licensee;

(7) To inspect agencies
periodically to determine whether or not there is compliance with chapter 74.15
RCW and RCW 74.13.031 and the requirements adopted hereunder;

(8) To review
requirements adopted hereunder at least every two years and to adopt
appropriate changes after consultation with the child care coordinating
committee and other affected groups for child day-care requirements and with
the children's services advisory committee for requirements for other agencies;
and

(9) To consult with
public and private agencies in order to help them improve their methods and
facilities for the care of children, expectant mothers, and ((developmentally
disabled persons)) individuals with developmental disabilities.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
10. The Washington personnel
resources board and the department of social and health services must adopt
emergency rules to implement this act to protect the health and safety of the
vulnerable clients of the department of social and health services.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 11. This act is necessary for
the immediate preservation of the public peace, health, or safety, or support
of the state government and its existing public institutions, and takes effect
immediately.

---
END ---