BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF
WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1. RCW 43.43.330 and 1993 c
155 s 1 are each amended to read as follows:

Appropriate
examinations shall be conducted for the promotion of commissioned patrol
officers to the rank of trooper first class, sergeant, and
lieutenant. The examinations shall be prepared and conducted under the
supervision of the chief of the Washington state patrol, who shall cause at
least thirty days written notice thereof to be given to all patrol officers
eligible for such examinations. The written notice shall specify the expected
type of examination and relative weights to be assigned if a combination of
tests is to be used. Examinations shall be given once every two years, or
whenever the eligible list becomes exhausted as the case may be. After the
giving of each such examination a new eligible list shall be compiled replacing
any existing eligible list for such rank. Only grades attained in the last
examination given for a particular rank shall be used in compiling each eligible
list therefor. The chief, or in his or her discretion a committee of
three individuals appointed by him or her, shall prepare and conduct the
examinations, and thereafter grade and evaluate them in accordance with the
following provisions, or factors: For promotion to the rank of trooper
first class, sergeant, or lieutenant, the examination shall consist
of one or more of the following components: (1) Oral examination; (2) written
examination; (3) service rating; (4) personnel record; (5) assessment center or
other valid tests that measures the skills, knowledge, and qualities needed to
perform these jobs. A cutoff score may be set for each testing component that
allows only those scoring above the cutoff on one component to proceed to take
a subsequent component.

Sec. 2. RCW 43.43.340 and 1985 c
365 s 6 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) The names of all
officers who have passed examinations satisfactorily shall be placed on an
eligible list in the order of the grade attained in the examinations. The
chief, or the committee mentioned in RCW 43.43.330 at the chief's request, may
determine the lowest examination grade which will qualify an officer for
inclusion of his or her name on an eligible list. Examination papers shall be
graded promptly and an eligible list shall be made up immediately thereafter.
All officers taking an examination shall be informed of the grade earned.

(2) After an eligible
list is made up all appointments to a specialty position and detective and
all promotions shall be made from the five top names on the applicable
list, and if needed to comply with affirmative action goals three additional
names referred under subsection (3) of this section. Not all three additional
names need be promoted at the time they are referred and they may be referred
more than once. Each officer shall be informed in writing as his or her name
is included in the top five on an eligible list or referred under subsection
(3) of this section. No officer whose name appears within the top five on any
eligible list shall be passed over for promotion more than three times.

(3) If the vacancy to
be filled is identified as part of the state patrol's affirmative action goals
as established under its affirmative action plan, the chief may refer for
consideration up to three additional names per vacancy of individuals who are
on the eligible list and who are members of one or more of the protected groups
under Title VII of the 1964 Civil Rights Act and chapter 49.60 RCW, or for
federal contract compliance purposes, veterans and disabled veterans as defined
in the Vietnam Era Veterans Readjustment Act of 1974, Title 41 C.F.R., chapter
60, part 60-250.

The three additional
names referred for each vacancy shall be the top three members of the protected
groups designated by the chief for referral for that vacancy in accordance with
the state patrol's affirmative action goals. These names shall be drawn in
rank order from the remaining names of protected group members on the eligible
list, after ranking by examination grade. For each vacancy, a total of three
supplementary names may be referred.

(4) After having
qualified for promotion ((hereunder)) under this section an
officer must pass a medical examination and must be certified as to physical
fitness to perform the duties of the advanced position by one of three doctors
designated by the chief of the Washington state patrol.

(5) The state patrol
shall consult with the human rights commission in the development of rules pertaining
to affirmative action. The state patrol shall transmit a report annually to
the human rights commission which states the progress the state patrol has made
in meeting affirmative action goals and timetables.

Sec. 3. RCW 43.43.350 and 1998 c
193 s 1 are each amended to read as follows:

Eligibility for
examination for promotion shall be determined as follows:

Patrol
officers with one year of probationary experience, in addition to three years
experience as a regular patrolman before the date of the first examination
occurrence, shall be eligible for examination for the rank of trooper first
class and sergeant; patrol officers with one year of probationary
experience in the rank of sergeant before the date of the first examination
occurrence, in addition to two years as a regular sergeant, shall be eligible
for examination for the rank of lieutenant.

---
END ---