BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF
WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1. RCW 82.08.0293 and 1988
c 103 s 1 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) The tax levied by
RCW 82.08.020 shall not apply to sales of food products for human consumption.

"Food
products" include cereals and cereal products, oleomargarine, meat and
meat products including livestock sold for personal consumption, fish and fish
products, eggs and egg products, vegetables and vegetable products, fruit and
fruit products, spices and salt, sugar and sugar products, coffee and coffee
substitutes, tea, cocoa and cocoa products.

"Food
products" include milk and milk products, milk shakes, malted milks, and
any other similar type beverages which are composed at least in part of milk or
a milk product and which require the use of milk or a milk product in their
preparation.

"Food
products" include all fruit juices, vegetable juices, and other beverages
except bottled water, spirituous, malt or vinous liquors or carbonated
beverages, whether liquid or frozen.

"Food
products" do not include medicines and preparations in liquid, powdered,
granular, tablet, capsule, lozenge, and pill form sold as dietary supplements
or adjuncts.

(2) The exemption of
"food products" provided for in subsection (1) of this section shall
not apply: (a) When the food products are ordinarily sold for immediate
consumption on or near a location at which parking facilities are provided
primarily for the use of patrons in consuming the products purchased at the
location, even though such products are sold on a "takeout" or
"to go" order and are actually packaged or wrapped and taken from the
premises of the retailer, or (b) when the food products are sold for
consumption within a place, the entrance to which is subject to an admission
charge, except for national and state parks and monuments, or (c) to a food
product, when sold by the retail vendor, which by law must be handled on the
vendor's premises by a person with a food and beverage service worker's permit
under RCW 69.06.010, including but not be limited to sandwiches prepared or
chicken cooked on the premises, deli trays, home-delivered pizzas or meals, and
salad bars but excluding:

(i) Raw meat prepared
by persons who slaughter animals, including fish and fowl, or dress or wrap slaughtered
raw meat such as fish mongers, butchers, or meat wrappers;

(ii) Meat and cheese
sliced and/or wrapped, in any quantity determined by the buyer, sold by vendors
such as meat markets, delicatessens, and grocery stores;

(iii) Bakeries which
only sell baked goods;

(iv) Combination bakery
businesses, as prescribed by rule of the department, to the extent that sales
of baked goods are separately accounted for and the baked goods claimed for
exemption are not sold as part of meals or with beverages in unsealed
containers; or

(v) Bulk food products
sold from bins or barrels, including but not limited to flour, fruits,
vegetables, sugar, salt, candy, chips, and cocoa.

(3) Notwithstanding
anything in this section to the contrary, the exemption of "food products"
provided in this section shall apply to food products which are furnished,
prepared, or served as meals:

(a) Under a state
administered nutrition program for the aged as provided for in the Older
Americans Act (P.L. 95-478 Title III) and RCW 74.38.040(6); or

(b) Which are provided
to senior citizens, disabled persons, or low-income persons by a not-for-profit
organization organized under chapter 24.03 or 24.12 RCW.

(4) ((Subsection (1)
of this section notwithstanding, the retail sale of food products is subject to
sales tax under RCW 82.08.020 if the food products are sold through a vending
machine, and in this case the selling price for purposes of RCW 82.08.020 is
fifty-seven percent of the gross receipts.

This subsection does
not apply to hot prepared food products, other than food products which are
heated after they have been dispensed from the vending machine.

For tax collected
under this subsection, the requirements that the tax be collected from the
buyer and that the amount of tax be stated as a separate item are waived.)) Subsection (2)(a) and (b) of this section
do not apply to food products sold through vending machines. The exempt or
nonexempt nature of food products sold through vending machines shall be
determined under subsection (1) of this section without regard to the location
of the vending machine.

Sec. 2. RCW 82.12.0293 and 1988
c 103 s 2 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) The provisions of
this chapter shall not apply in respect to the use of food products for human
consumption.

"Food
products" include cereals and cereal products, oleomargarine, meat and
meat products including livestock sold for personal consumption, fish and fish
products, eggs and egg products, vegetables and vegetable products, fruit and
fruit products, spices and salt, sugar and sugar products, coffee and coffee
substitutes, tea, cocoa and cocoa products.

"Food
products" include milk and milk products, milk shakes, malted milks, and
any other similar type beverages which are composed at least in part of milk or
a milk product and which require the use of milk or a milk product in their
preparation.

"Food
products" include all fruit juices, vegetable juices, and other beverages
except bottled water, spirituous, malt or vinous liquors or carbonated
beverages, whether liquid or frozen.

"Food
products" do not include medicines and preparations in liquid, powdered,
granular, tablet, capsule, lozenge, and pill form sold as dietary supplements
or adjuncts.

(2) The exemption of
"food products" provided for in subsection (1) of this section shall
not apply: (a) When the food products are ordinarily sold for immediate
consumption on or near a location at which parking facilities are provided
primarily for the use of patrons in consuming the products purchased at the
location, even though such products are sold on a "takeout" or
"to go" order and are actually packaged or wrapped and taken from the
premises of the retailer, or (b) when the food products are sold for
consumption within a place, the entrance to which is subject to an admission
charge, except for national and state parks and monuments, or (c) to a food
product, when sold by the retail vendor, which by law must be handled on the
vendor's premises by a person with a food and beverage service worker's permit
under RCW 69.06.010, including but not be limited to sandwiches prepared or
chicken cooked on the premises, deli trays, home-delivered pizzas or meals, and
salad bars but excluding:

(i) Raw meat prepared
by persons who slaughter animals, including fish and fowl, or dress or wrap
slaughtered raw meat such as fish mongers, butchers, or meat wrappers;

(ii) Meat and cheese
sliced and/or wrapped, in any quantity determined by the buyer, sold by vendors
such as meat markets, delicatessens, and grocery stores;

(iii) Bakeries which
only sell baked goods;

(iv) Combination bakery
businesses, as prescribed by rule of the department, to the extent that sales
of baked goods are separately accounted for and the baked goods claimed for
exemption are not sold as part of meals or with beverages in unsealed containers;
or

(v) Bulk food products
sold from bins or barrels, including but not limited to flour, fruits,
vegetables, sugar, salt, candy, chips, and cocoa.

(3) Notwithstanding
anything in this section to the contrary, the exemption of "food
products" provided in this section shall apply to food products which are
furnished, prepared, or served as meals:

(a) Under a state
administered nutrition program for the aged as provided for in the Older
Americans Act (P.L. 95-478 Title III) and RCW 74.38.040(6); or

(b) Which are provided
to senior citizens, disabled persons, or low-income persons by a not-for-profit
organization organized under chapter 24.03 or 24.12 RCW.

(4)
Subsection (2)(a) and (b) of this section do not apply to food products sold
through vending machines. The exempt or nonexempt nature of food products sold
through vending machines shall be determined under subsection (1) of this
section without regard to the location of the vending machine.

---
END ---