BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF
WASHINGTON:

_5 NEW SECTION. Sec. 1. A new section is
added to chapter 28A.410

_6 RCW to read as follows:

_7 Certificated instructional staff who have a master's
degree and

_8 ninety credits shall not be required to obtain
continuing

_9 education.

‑‑‑ END ‑‑‑

p. 1 HB
1779