BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF
WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1. RCW 5.60.060 and 1998 c
72 s 1 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) A husband shall not
be examined for or against his wife, without the consent of the wife, nor a
wife for or against her husband without the consent of the husband; nor can
either during marriage or afterward, be without the consent of the other,
examined as to any communication made by one to the other during marriage. But
this exception shall not apply to a civil action or proceeding by one against
the other, nor to a criminal action or proceeding for a crime committed by one
against the other, nor to a criminal action or proceeding against a spouse if
the marriage occurred subsequent to the filing of formal charges against the
defendant, nor to a criminal action or proceeding for a crime committed by said
husband or wife against any child of whom said husband or wife is the parent or
guardian, nor to a proceeding under chapter 70.96A or 71.05 RCW: PROVIDED,
That the spouse of a person sought to be detained under chapter 70.96A or 71.05
RCW may not be compelled to testify and shall be so informed by the court prior
to being called as a witness.

(2)(a) An attorney or
counselor shall not, without the consent of his or her client, be examined as
to any communication made by the client to him or her, or his or her advice
given thereon in the course of professional employment.

(b) A parent or
guardian of a minor child arrested on a criminal charge may not be examined as
to a communication between the child and his or her attorney if the communication
was made in the presence of the parent or guardian. This privilege does not
extend to communications made prior to the arrest.

(3) A member of the
clergy or a priest shall not, without the consent of a person making the
confession, be examined as to any confession made to him or her in his or her
professional character, in the course of discipline enjoined by the church to
which he or she belongs.

(4) Subject to the
limitations under RCW 70.96A.140 or 71.05.250, a physician or surgeon or osteopathic
physician or surgeon or podiatric physician or surgeon shall not, without the
consent of his or her patient, be examined in a civil action as to any
information acquired in attending such patient, which was necessary to enable
him or her to prescribe or act for the patient, except as follows:

(a) In any judicial
proceedings regarding a child's injury, neglect, or sexual abuse or the cause
thereof; and

(b) Ninety days after
filing an action for personal injuries or wrongful death, the claimant shall be
deemed to waive the physician-patient privilege. Waiver of the
physician-patient privilege for any one physician or condition constitutes a
waiver of the privilege as to all physicians or conditions, subject to such
limitations as a court may impose pursuant to court rules.

(5) A public officer
shall not be examined as a witness as to communications made to him or her in
official confidence, when the public interest would suffer by the disclosure.

(6)(a) A trained
peer ((support group counselor)) supporter shall not, without
consent of the law enforcement officer or fire fighter making the
communication, be compelled to testify about any communication made to the ((counselor))
trained peer supporter by the officer or fire fighter while
receiving ((counseling)) peer support services. The ((counselor))
trained peer supporter must be designated as such by the sheriff, police
chief, ((or)) chief of the Washington state patrol, or fire
department prior to the incident that results in ((counseling)) receiving
peer support services. The privilege only applies when the communication
was made to the ((counselor)) trained peer supporter while acting
in his or her capacity as a trained peer ((support group counselor))
supporter. The privilege does not apply if the ((counselor)) trained
peer supporter was an initial responding officer, a witness, or a party to
the incident which prompted the delivery of peer support ((group counseling))
services to the law enforcement officer or fire fighter.

(b) For purposes of
this section, "trained peer ((support group counselor)) supporter"
means a:

(i) Law enforcement
officer, fire fighter, or civilian employee of a law enforcement agency or
fire department, who has received training to provide emotional and moral
support ((and counseling)) to an officer or fire fighter who
needs those services as a result of an incident in which the officer or fire
fighter was involved while acting in his or her official capacity; or

(ii) Nonemployee
counselor or other mental health services provider who has been
designated by the sheriff, police chief, ((or)) chief of the Washington
state patrol, or fire department as a trained peer supporter to provide
emotional and moral support and counseling to an officer or fire fighter
who needs those services as a result of an incident in which the officer or
fire fighter was involved while acting in his or her official capacity.

(7) A sexual assault
advocate may not, without the consent of the victim, be examined as to any
communication made by the victim to the sexual assault advocate.

(a) For purposes of
this section, "sexual assault advocate" means the employee or
volunteer from a rape crisis center, victim assistance unit, program, or
association, that provides information, medical or legal advocacy, counseling,
or support to victims of sexual assault, who is designated by the victim to
accompany the victim to the hospital or other health care facility and to
proceedings concerning the alleged assault, including police and prosecution
interviews and court proceedings.

(b) A
sexual assault advocate may disclose a confidential communication without the
consent of the victim if failure to disclose is likely to result in a clear,
imminent risk of serious physical injury or death of the victim or another
person. Any sexual assault advocate participating in good faith in the
disclosing of records and communications under this section shall have immunity
from any liability, civil, criminal, or otherwise, that might result from the
action. In any proceeding, civil or criminal, arising out of a disclosure
under this section, the good faith of the sexual assault advocate who disclosed
the confidential communication shall be presumed.

--- END ---