BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF
WASHINGTON:

_4 Sec. 1. RCW
74.08A.010 and 1997 c 58 s 103 are each amended to

_5 read as follows:

_6 (1) A family that includes an adult who has received
temporary

_7 assistance for needy families for sixty months after
July 27,

_8 1997, shall be ineligible for further temporary
assistance for

_9 needy families assistance.

10 (2) For the purposes of applying the rules of this
section, the

11 department shall count any month in which an adult
family member

12 received a temporary assistance for needy families cash
assistance

13 grant unless the assistance was provided when the family
member

14 was a minor child and not the head of the household or
married to

15 the head of the household.

16 (3) The department shall refer recipients who
require

17 specialized assistance to appropriate department
programs, crime

p. 1 HB
1784

_1 victims' programs through the department of community,
trade, and

_2 economic development, or the crime victims' compensation
program

_3 of the department of labor and industries.

_4 (4) The department may exempt a recipient and the
recipient's

_5 family from the application of subsection (1) of this
section by

_6 reason of hardship or if the recipient meets the family
violence

_7 options of section 402(A)(7) of Title IVA of the federal
social

_8 security act as amended by P.L. 104-193.

_9 (5) The department may exempt a recipient from
the application

10 of subsection (1) of this section if the recipient is
a minor

11 child in a family that includes an adult who has
received

12 temporary assistance for needy families for sixty
months after

13 July 27, 1997. The safety net services program is
created for

14 recipients exempted under this provision from the
application of

15 subsection (1) of this section.

16 (6) The number of recipients and their
families exempted from

17 subsection (1) of this section for a fiscal year shall
not exceed

18 twenty percent of the average monthly number of
recipients and

19 their families to which assistance is provided under the
temporary

20 assistance for needy families program.

21 (((5))) (7) The department shall not
exempt a recipient and his

22 or her family from the application of subsection (1) of
this

23 section until after the recipient has received fifty-two
months of

24 assistance under this chapter.

‑‑‑ END ‑‑‑

HB 1784 p. 2