BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF
WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec.
1. The legislature finds
that the amount of overall requests for funding for natural resource-related
programs in the capital budget has been steadily growing. The legislature also
finds that there is an increasing interest by the public in examining the
performance of the projects and programs to determine the return on their
investments and that a coordinated and integrated response by state agencies
will allow for better targeting of resources. The legislature further finds
that there is a need to improve the data and the integration of data that is
collected by state agencies and grant and loan recipients in order to better
measure the outcomes of projects and programs. The legislature intends to
begin implementing the recommendations contained in the joint legislative audit
and review committee's report number 01-1 on investing in the environment in
order to improve the efficiency, effectiveness, and accountability of these
natural resource-related programs funded in the state capital budget.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
2. A new section is added
to chapter 43.41 RCW to read as follows:

(1) The office of
financial management shall assist natural resource-related agencies in
developing outcome focused performance measures for administering natural
resource-related and environmentally based grant and loan programs. These
performance measures are to be used in determining grant eligibility, for
program management and performance assessment.

(2) The office of
financial management and the governor's salmon recovery office shall assist
natural resource-related agencies in developing recommendations for a
monitoring program to measure outcome focused performance measures required by
this section.

(3) Natural resource
agencies shall consult with grant or loan recipients including local
governments, tribes, nongovernmental organizations, and other interested
parties, and report to the office of financial management on the implementation
of this section. The office of financial management shall report to the
natural resource and fiscal committees of the legislature on the agencies'
implementation of this section, including any necessary changes in current law,
and funding requirements by July 31, 2002. Natural resource agencies shall
assist the office of financial management in preparing the report, including
complying with time frames for submitting information established by the office
of financial management.

(4) For purposes of
this section, "natural resource-related agencies" include the
department of ecology, the department of natural resources, the state
conservation commission, the interagency committee for outdoor recreation, the
salmon recovery funding board, and the public works board within the department
of community, trade, and economic development.

(5) For purposes of
this section, "natural resource-related environmentally based grant and
loan programs" include the conservation reserve enhancement program; dairy
nutrient management grants under chapter 90.64 RCW; state conservation
commission water quality grants under chapter 89.08 RCW; coordinated prevention
grants, public participation grants and remedial action grants under RCW
70.105D.070; water pollution control facilities financing under chapter 70.146
RCW; aquatic lands enhancement grants under RCW 79.24.580; habitat grants under
the Washington wildlife and recreation program under RCW 79A.15.040; salmon
recovery grants under chapter 77.85 RCW; and the public work trust fund program
under chapter 43.155 RCW.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
3. A new section is added
to chapter 89.08 RCW to read as follows:

In administering grant
programs to improve water quality and protect habitat, the commission shall
require grant recipients to incorporate the environmental benefits of the
project into their grant applications, and the commission shall utilize the
statement of environmental benefit in its grant prioritization and selection
process. The commission shall also develop appropriate outcome focused
performance measures to be used both for management and performance assessment
of the grant program. The commission shall work with the districts to develop
uniform performance measures across participating districts. To the extent
possible, the commission should coordinate its performance measure system with
other natural resource-related agencies. The commission shall consult with
affected interest groups in implementing this section.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
4. A new section is added
to chapter 90.64 RCW to read as follows:

In providing grants to
dairy producers, districts shall require grant applicants to incorporate the
environmental benefits of the project into their applications, and the districts
shall utilize the statement of environmental benefit in their prioritization
and selection process. The districts shall also develop appropriate outcome
focused performance measures to be used both for management and performance
assessment of the program. The commission shall work with the districts to
develop uniform performance measures across participating districts. To the
extent possible, the commission should coordinate its performance measure
system with other natural resource-related agencies. The commission shall
consult with affected interest groups in implementing this section.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
5. A new section is added
to chapter 70.105D RCW to read as follows:

In providing grants to
local governments, the department shall require grant recipients to incorporate
the environmental benefits of the project into their grant applications, and
the department shall utilize the statement of environmental benefit in its
prioritization and selection process. The department shall also develop
appropriate outcome focused performance measures to be used both for management
and performance assessment of the grant program. To the extent possible, the
department should coordinate its performance measure system with other natural
resource-related agencies. The department shall consult with affected interest
groups in implementing this section.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
6. A new section is added
to chapter 70.146 RCW to read as follows:

In providing grants and
loans to local governments, the department shall require recipients to
incorporate the environmental benefits of the project into their applications,
and the department shall utilize the statement of environmental benefits in its
grant and loan prioritization and selection process. The department shall also
develop appropriate outcome focused performance measures to be used both for
management and performance assessment of the grant and loan program. To the
extent possible, the department should coordinate its performance measure
system with other natural resource-related agencies. The department shall
consult with affected interest groups in implementing this section.

Sec. 7. RCW 79.24.580 and 1999 c
309 s 919 are each amended to read as follows:

After deduction for
management costs as provided in RCW 79.64.040 and payments to towns under RCW
79.92.110(2), all moneys received by the state from the sale or lease of
state-owned aquatic lands and from the sale of valuable material from
state-owned aquatic lands shall be deposited in the aquatic lands enhancement
account which is hereby created in the state treasury. After appropriation,
these funds shall be used solely for aquatic lands enhancement projects; for the
purchase, improvement, or protection of aquatic lands for public purposes; for
providing and improving access to such lands; and for volunteer cooperative
fish and game projects.

In providing grants
for aquatic lands enhancement projects, the department shall require grant
recipients to incorporate the environmental benefits of the project into their
grant applications, and department shall utilize the statement of environmental
benefits in its prioritization and selection process. The department shall
also develop appropriate outcome focused performance measures to be used both
for management and performance assessment of the grants. To the extent
possible, the department should coordinate its performance measure system with
other natural resource-related agencies. The department shall consult with
affected interest groups in implementing this section.

During the fiscal
biennium ending June 30, 2001, the funds may be appropriated for boating
safety, shellfish management, enforcement, and enhancement and for developing
and implementing plans for population monitoring and restoration of native wild
salmon stock.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
8. A new section is added
to chapter 79A.15 RCW to read as follows:

In providing grants
through the habitat conservation account, the committee shall require grant
applicants to incorporate the environmental benefits of the project into their
grant applications, and the committee shall utilize the statement of
environmental benefits in the grant application and review process. The
committee shall also develop appropriate outcome focused performance measures
to be used both for management and performance assessment of the grant
program. To the extent possible, the department should coordinate its
performance measure system with other natural resource-related agencies. The
committee shall consult with affected interest groups in implementing this
section.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
9. A new section is added
to chapter 77.85 RCW to read as follows:

In providing funding
for habitat projects, the board shall require recipients to incorporate the
environmental benefits of the project into their grant applications, and the
board shall utilize the statement of environmental benefits in its
prioritization and selection process. The board shall also develop appropriate
outcome focused performance measures to be used both for management and
performance assessment of the grant program. To the extent possible, the board
should coordinate its performance measure system with other natural
resource-related agencies. The board shall consult with affected interest
groups in implementing this section.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
10. A new section is added
to chapter 43.155 RCW to read as follows:

In
providing loans for public works projects, the board shall require recipients
to incorporate the environmental benefits of the project into their
applications, and the board shall utilize the statement of environmental
benefits in its prioritization and selection process. The board shall also
develop appropriate outcome focused performance measures to be used both for
management and performance assessment of the loan program. To the extent
possible, the department should coordinate its performance measure system with
other natural resource-related agencies. The board shall consult with affected
interest groups in implementing this section.

---
END ---