BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF
WASHINGTON:

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 1. The director of labor and
industries shall establish rules that will authorize physician assistants
licensed under chapter 18.57A or 18.71A RCW to sign initial evaluations of
patients covered under chapter 51.04 RCW.

---
END ---