BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1. RCW 84.34.108 and 1999
sp.s. c 4 s 706 and 1999 c 233 s 22 are each reenacted and amended to read as
follows:

(1) When land has once
been classified under this chapter, a notation of such classification shall be
made each year upon the assessment and tax rolls and such land shall be valued
pursuant to RCW 84.34.060 or 84.34.065 until removal of all or a portion of
such classification by the assessor upon occurrence of any of the following:

(a) Receipt of notice
from the owner to remove all or a portion of such classification;

(b) Sale or transfer to
an ownership, except a transfer that resulted from a default in loan payments
made to or secured by a governmental agency that intends to or is required by
law or regulation to resell the property for the same use as before, making all
or a portion of such land exempt from ad valorem taxation;

(c) Sale or transfer of
all or a portion of such land to a new owner, unless the new owner has signed a
notice of classification continuance, except transfer to an owner who is an
heir or devisee of a deceased owner shall not, by itself, result in removal of
classification. The notice of continuance shall be on a form prepared by the
department of revenue. If the notice of continuance is not signed by the new
owner and attached to the real estate excise tax affidavit, all additional
taxes calculated pursuant to subsection (4) of this section shall become due
and payable by the seller or transferor at time of sale. The county auditor
shall not accept an instrument of conveyance of classified land for filing or
recording unless the new owner has signed the notice of continuance or the
additional tax has been paid, as evidenced by the real estate excise tax stamp
affixed thereto by the treasurer. The seller, transferor, or new owner may
appeal the new assessed valuation calculated under subsection (4) of this
section to the county board of equalization. Jurisdiction is hereby conferred
on the county board of equalization to hear these appeals;

(d) Determination by
the assessor, after giving the owner written notice and an opportunity to be
heard, that all or a portion of such land no longer meets the criteria for
classification under this chapter. The criteria for classification pursuant to
this chapter continue to apply after classification has been granted.

The granting authority,
upon request of an assessor, shall provide reasonable assistance to the
assessor in making a determination whether such land continues to meet the
qualifications of RCW 84.34.020 (1) or (3). The assistance shall be provided
within thirty days of receipt of the request.

(2) Land may not be
removed from classification because of:

(a) The creation, sale,
or transfer of forestry riparian easements under RCW 76.13.120; or

(b) The creation, sale,
or transfer of a fee interest or a conservation easement for the riparian open
space program under RCW 76.09.040.

(3) Within thirty days
after such removal of all or a portion of such land from current use
classification, the assessor shall notify the owner in writing, setting forth
the reasons for such removal. The seller, transferor, or owner may appeal such
removal to the county board of equalization.

(4) Unless the removal
is reversed on appeal, the assessor shall revalue the affected land with
reference to full market value on the date of removal from classification.
Both the assessed valuation before and after the removal of classification
shall be listed and taxes shall be allocated according to that part of the year
to which each assessed valuation applies. Except as provided in subsection (6)
of this section, an additional tax, applicable interest, and penalty shall be
imposed which shall be due and payable to the county treasurer thirty days
after the owner is notified of the amount of the additional tax. As soon as
possible, the assessor shall compute the amount of such an additional tax,
applicable interest, and penalty and the treasurer shall mail notice to the
owner of the amount thereof and the date on which payment is due. The amount
of such additional tax, applicable interest, and penalty shall be determined as
follows:

(a) The amount of
additional tax shall be equal to the difference between the property tax paid
as "open space land", "farm and agricultural land", or
"timber land" and the amount of property tax otherwise due and
payable for the seven years last past had the land not been so classified;

(b) The amount of applicable
interest shall be equal to the interest upon the amounts of such additional tax
paid at the same statutory rate charged on delinquent property taxes from the
dates on which such additional tax could have been paid without penalty if the
land had been assessed at a value without regard to this chapter;

(c) The amount of the
penalty shall be as provided in RCW 84.34.080. The penalty shall not be
imposed if the removal satisfies the conditions of RCW 84.34.070.

(5) Additional tax,
applicable interest, and penalty, shall become a lien on such land which shall
attach at the time such land is removed from classification under this chapter
and shall have priority to and shall be fully paid and satisfied before any
recognizance, mortgage, judgment, debt, obligation or responsibility to or with
which such land may become charged or liable. Such lien may be foreclosed upon
expiration of the same period after delinquency and in the same manner provided
by law for foreclosure of liens for delinquent real property taxes as provided
in RCW 84.64.050 now or as hereafter amended. Any additional tax unpaid on its
due date shall thereupon become delinquent. From the date of delinquency until
paid, interest shall be charged at the same rate applied by law to delinquent
ad valorem property taxes.

(6) The additional tax,
applicable interest, and penalty specified in subsection (4) of this section
shall not be imposed if the removal of classification pursuant to subsection
(1) of this section resulted solely from:

(a) Transfer to a
government entity in exchange for other land located within the state of
Washington;

(b)(i) A taking through
the exercise of the power of eminent domain, or (ii) sale or transfer to an
entity having the power of eminent domain in anticipation of the exercise of
such power, said entity having manifested its intent in writing or by other
official action;

(c) A natural disaster
such as a flood, windstorm, earthquake, or other such calamity rather than by
virtue of the act of the landowner changing the use of such property;

(d) Official action by
an agency of the state of Washington or by the county or city within which the
land is located which disallows the present use of such land;

(e) Transfer of land to
a church when such land would qualify for exemption pursuant to RCW 84.36.020;

(f) Acquisition of
property interests by state agencies or agencies or organizations qualified
under RCW 84.34.210 and 64.04.130 for the purposes enumerated in those
sections: PROVIDED, That at such time as these property interests are not used
for the purposes enumerated in RCW 84.34.210 and 64.04.130 the additional tax
specified in subsection (4) of this section shall be imposed;

(g) Removal of land
classified as farm and agricultural land under RCW 84.34.020(2)(d);

(h) Removal of land
from classification after enactment of a statutory exemption that qualifies the
land for exemption and receipt of notice from the owner to remove the land from
classification;

(i) The creation, sale,
or transfer of forestry riparian easements under RCW 76.13.120; ((or))

(j) The creation, sale,
or transfer of a fee interest or a conservation easement for the riparian open
space program under RCW 76.09.040; or

(k) Transfer of land
to a foundation of an institution of higher education, as defined in RCW
28B.10.016, when the land would qualify for exemption pursuant to RCW
84.36.050. For the purposes of this subsection (6)(k), a "foundation of
an institution of higher education" means a private nonprofit corporation
that: (i) Is registered under Title 24 RCW and qualified as a tax-exempt
entity under section 501(c)(3) of the federal internal revenue code; (ii)
exists solely for the benefit of an institution of higher education in this
state; and (iii) is registered with the attorney general's office under chapter
11.110 RCW.

Sec. 2. RCW 84.36.050 and 1984 c
220 s 5 are each amended to read as follows:

The following property
shall be exempt from taxation:

Property
owned or used for any nonprofit university, school ((or)),
college, or foundation of an institution of higher education as defined in
RCW 84.34.108(6)(k) in this state for educational purposes or cultural or
art educational programs as defined in RCW 82.04.4328. Real property so exempt
shall not exceed four hundred acres in extent and, except as provided in RCW
84.36.805, shall be used exclusively for college or campus purposes including
but not limited to, buildings and grounds designed for the educational,
athletic, or social programs of said institution, the housing of students, the
housing of religious faculty, the housing of the chief administrator, athletic
buildings and all other school or college facilities, the need for which would
be nonexistent but for the presence of such school or college and which are
principally designed to further the educational functions of such college or
schools. If the property is leased, the benefit of the exemption shall inure
to the user.

---
END ---