BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF
WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec.
1. The purpose of this
chapter is to establish a certification program for managers of mobile home
parks.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
2. Unless the context
clearly requires otherwise, the definitions in this section apply throughout
this chapter.

(1) "Advisory
council" means the advisory council on mobile home park manager training
and certification created in section 7 of this act.

(2)
"Department" means the department of community, trade, and economic
development.

(3)
"Director" means the director of the department of community, trade,
and economic development.

(4) "Mobile home
park" has the same meaning as in RCW 59.20.030.

(5) "Mobile home
park management" means those actions, functions, or duties related to the
management of a mobile home park.

(6) "Mobile home
park manager" means a person who performs mobile home park management
duties and is required to be certified under this chapter to perform mobile
home park management services and does not include resident owners of mobile
home parks who perform management duties.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
3. (1) A person will not
manage a mobile home park in this state for any mobile home park with more than
twenty-five mobile home lots until a certificate of registration certifying him
or her as a mobile home park manager has been issued to him or her by the
director in accordance with this chapter, except that a person initially
employed as a park manager after the effective date of this act may be employed
in that capacity for no more than ninety consecutive days following
commencement of employment. At the end of that ninety-day period the park
manager must have attained certification in accordance with this chapter or
immediately cease their employment.

(2) A corporation,
partnership, trust, association, sole proprietor, or other like organization
may own or operate a mobile home park or engage in the business of mobile home
park management without being certified if it employs, retains, or contracts
with certified natural persons who are registered mobile home park managers
subject to this chapter.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
4. (1) The director will not
issue an initial certificate of registration to any person to act as a mobile
home park manager until that person has:

(a) Executed a written
application on a form prescribed by the director, subscribed and sworn to by
the applicant;

(b) Attended and
completed a department-approved training course for mobile home park managers;

(c) Passed an
examination approved by the department which demonstrates that the applicant
has a fundamental knowledge of the manufactured/mobile home landlord-tenant act
under chapter 59.20 RCW; and

(d) Paid to the
director a fee authorized in section 8 of this act.

(2) Certificates of
registration are effective on the date issued by the department and must be
renewed every two years.

(3) A certificate of
registration may be renewed annually provided the applicant provides evidence
of continuing education as approved by the department. This evidence must be
submitted with an application to renew certification. A maximum of eight hours
of continuing education biennially may be required by the department for
renewal of certification.

(4) As of the effective
date of this section, mobile home park managers may present a verification of
having successfully completed a training course conducted by a statewide trade
association of mobile home park owners, which will satisfy the initial training
requirement for one year and entitle the park manager to certification for that
year.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
5. The department will
contract with a statewide trade association exclusively representing mobile
home park owners for the delivery of training courses required by this
chapter. Training courses shall be made available within ninety days after the
effective date of this section. The trade association may charge a fee for
delivery of the training courses. The department, in consultation with the
advisory council, will approve the curriculum of the training program.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
6. (1) The department, in
consultation with the advisory council, will administer, coordinate, and
enforce this chapter, develop the examination of applicants, and be responsible
for the granting of certificates to qualified persons.

(2) The department is
authorized to adopt rules that are necessary to implement, enforce, and
interpret this chapter.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
7. (1) There is created an
advisory council on mobile home park manager training and certification. The
council consists of five members as follows: Two members of the council must
be residents of mobile home parks; two members must be owners of mobile home
parks; and one member must be the director or the director's designee, who
serves as the chair of the council and is a nonvoting member. The resident
members of the council must be selected from nominees submitted by organizations
that represent mobile home owners. The park owner members of the council must
be selected from nominees submitted by the manufacturing housing communities of
Washington. The director will appoint the members for terms of two years.

(2) Members of the council
will serve without compensation but are entitled to receive reimbursement for
travel expenses as provided in RCW 43.03.050 and 43.03.060.

(3) The functions of
the advisory council are to:

(a) Review, evaluate,
and advise the department concerning revisions and adoption of rules affecting
certification of mobile home park managers and the fees to be charged under
section 8 of this act; and

(b) Develop, review,
revise, and approve, in consultation with the department, the program for
certification of mobile home park managers.

(4) The advisory
council will meet at the call of its chair, at the request of a majority of its
membership, at the request of the department, or at such times as are
prescribed by rule.

(5) The department will
provide adequate staff support to the advisory council to assist it in
fulfilling its duties.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
8. The department may charge
reasonable fees for services under this chapter that include, but are not
limited to, the initial application fee, an application renewal fee, and fees
for manager certification training costs. These fees are not intended to
exceed the cost of providing the service under this chapter.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
9. Sections 3 and 4 of this
act take effect January 1, 2003.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
10. If any provision of this
act or its application to any person or circumstance is held invalid, the
remainder of the act or the application of the provision to other persons or
circumstances is not affected.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
11. The sum of thirty‑five
thousand dollars, or as much thereof as may be necessary, is appropriated for
the fiscal year ending June 30, 2003, from the general fund to the department
of community, trade, and economic development for the purposes of this act.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 12. Sections 1 through 10 of
this act constitute a new chapter in Title 18 RCW.

---
END ---