BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF
WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec.
1. The definitions in this
section apply throughout this chapter, unless the context clearly requires
otherwise.

(1)
"Acquisition" or "acquire" means an agreement, arrangement,
or activity, the consummation of which results in a person acquiring directly
or indirectly the control of another person, and includes but is not limited to
the acquisition of voting securities, all or substantially all of the assets,
bulk reinsurance, consolidations, affiliations, and mergers.

(2)
"Affiliate" of, or person "affiliated" with, a specific
person, means a person who directly, or indirectly through one or more
intermediaries, controls, or is controlled by, or is under common control with,
the person specified.

(3)
"Control," including the terms "controlling,"
"controlled by," and "under common control with," means the
possession, direct or indirect, of the power to direct or cause the direction
of the management and policies of a person whether through the ownership of
voting securities, voting rights, by contract other than a commercial contract
for goods, nonmanagement services, a debt obligation which is not convertible
into a right to acquire a voting security, or otherwise, unless the power is
the result of an official position with or corporate office held by the person.

(a) For a for-profit
person, control is presumed to exist if a person, directly or indirectly, owns,
controls, holds with the power to vote, or holds proxies representing, ten
percent or more of the voting securities of any other person. This presumption
may be rebutted by a showing that control does not exist in fact. A person may
file with the commissioner a disclaimer of control of a health carrier. The
disclaimer must fully disclose all material relationships and bases for
affiliation between the person and the health carrier as well as the basis for
disclaiming the control. After furnishing all persons in interest notice and
opportunity to be heard and making specific findings of fact to support such a
determination, the commissioner may:

(i) Allow a disclaimer;
or

(ii) Disallow a
disclaimer notwithstanding the absence of a presumption to that effect.

(b) For a nonprofit
corporation organized under chapters 24.03 and 24.06 RCW, control is presumed
to exist if a person, directly or indirectly, owns, controls, holds with the
power to vote, or holds proxies representing a majority of voting rights of the
person or the power to elect or appoint a majority of the board of directors,
trustees, or other governing body of the person, unless the power is the result
of an official position of, or corporate office held by, the person.

(c) Control includes
either permanent or temporary control, or both.

(4) "Domestic
health carrier" means a health care service contractor as defined in RCW
48.44.010, or a health maintenance organization as defined in RCW 48.46.020,
that is formed under the laws of this state.

(5) "Foreign
health carrier" means a health care service contractor as defined in RCW
48.44.010, or a health maintenance organization as defined in RCW 48.46.020,
that is formed under the laws of the United States, of a state or territory of
the United States other than this state, or the District of Columbia.

(6) "Health
carrier holding company system" means two or more affiliated persons, one
or more of which is a health care service contractor or health maintenance
organization.

(7) "Health
coverage business" means the business of a disability insurer authorized
under chapter 48.05 RCW, a health care service contractor registered under
chapter 48.44 RCW, and a health maintenance organization registered under
chapter 48.46 RCW, entering into any policy, contract, or agreement to arrange,
reimburse, or pay for health care services.

(8) "Involved
carrier" means an insurer, health care service contractor, or health
maintenance organization, which either acquires or is acquired, is affiliated
with an acquirer or acquired, or is the result of a merger.

(9) "Person"
means an individual, corporation, partnership, association, joint stock
company, limited liability company, trust, unincorporated organization, similar
entity, or any combination acting in concert, but does not include a joint
venture partnership exclusively engaged in owning, managing, leasing, or
developing real or personal property.

(10) "Security
holder" of a specified person means one who owns a security of that
person, including (a) common stock, (b) preferred stock, (c) debt obligations
convertible into the right to acquire voting securities, and any other security
convertible into or evidencing the right to acquire (a) through (c) of this
subsection.

(11)
"Subsidiary" of a specified person means an affiliate controlled by
that person directly or indirectly through one or more intermediaries.

(12) "Voting
security" includes a security convertible into or evidencing a right to
acquire a voting security.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
2. (1) No person may acquire
control of a foreign health carrier registered to do business in this state
unless a preacquisition notification is filed with the commissioner under this
section and the waiting period has expired. If a preacquisition notification
is not filed with the commissioner an involved carrier may be subject to an
order under subsection (3) of this section. The acquired person may file a
preacquisition notification.

(a) The preacquisition
notification must be in the form and contain the information prescribed by the
commissioner. The commissioner may require additional material and information
necessary to determine whether the proposed acquisition, if consummated, would
have the effect of substantially lessening competition, or tending to create a
monopoly, in the health coverage business in this state. The required
information may include an opinion of an economist as to the competitive impact
of the acquisition in this state accompanied by a summary of the education and
experience of the person indicating his or her ability to render an informed
opinion.

(b) The waiting period
required under this section begins on the date the commissioner receives the
preacquisition notification and ends on the earlier of the sixtieth day after
the date of the receipt by the commissioner of the preacquisition notification
or the termination of the waiting period by the commissioner. Before the end
of the waiting period, the commissioner may require the submission of
additional needed information relevant to the proposed acquisition. If
additional information is required, the waiting period ends on the earlier of
the thirtieth day after the commissioner has received the additional
information or the termination of the waiting period by the commissioner.

(2)(a) The commissioner
may enter an order under subsection (3)(a) of this section with respect to an
acquisition if:

(i) The health carrier
fails to file adequate information in compliance with subsection (1)(a) of this
section; or

(ii) The antitrust
section of the office of the attorney general and any federal antitrust
enforcement agency has chosen not to undertake a review of the proposed
acquisition and the commissioner pursuant to his or her own review finds that
there is substantial evidence that the effect of the acquisition may
substantially lessen competition or tend to create a monopoly in the health
coverage business.

(b) If the antitrust
section of the office of the attorney general undertakes a review of the
proposed transaction then the attorney general shall seek input from the
commissioner throughout the review.

(c) If the antitrust
section of the office of the attorney general does not undertake a review of
the proposed acquisition and the review is being conducted by the commissioner,
then the commissioner shall seek input from the attorney general throughout the
review.

(3)(a)(i) If an
acquisition violates the standards of this section, the commissioner may enter
an order:

(A) Requiring an
involved carrier to cease and desist from doing business in this state with
respect to business as a health care service contractor or health maintenance
organization; or

(B) Denying the
application of an acquired or acquiring carrier for a license, certificate of
authority, or registration to do business in this state.

(ii) The commissioner
may not enter the order unless:

(A) There is a hearing;

(B) Notice of the
hearing is issued before the end of the waiting period and not less than
fifteen days before the hearing; and

(C) The hearing is
concluded and the order is issued no later than thirty days after the
conclusion of the hearing.

Every order must be
accompanied by a written decision of the commissioner setting forth his or her
findings of fact and conclusions of law.

(iii) An order entered
under (a) of this subsection may not become final earlier than thirty days
after it is issued, during which time the involved carrier may submit a plan to
remedy the anticompetitive impact of the acquisition within a reasonable time.
Based upon the plan or other information, the commissioner shall specify the
conditions, if any, under the time period during which the aspects of the
acquisition causing a violation of the standards of this section would be
remedied and the order vacated or modified.

(iv) An order under (a)
of this subsection does not apply if the acquisition is not consummated.

(b) A person who
violates a cease and desist order of the commissioner under (a) of this
subsection and while the order is in effect, may, after notice and hearing and
upon order of the commissioner, be subject at the discretion of the
commissioner to one or more of the following:

(i) A monetary penalty
of not more than ten thousand dollars for every day of violation; or

(ii) Suspension or
revocation of the person's license, certificate of authority, or registration;
or

(iii) Both (b)(i) and
(b)(ii) of this subsection.

(c) A carrier or other
person who fails to make a filing required by this section and who also fails
to demonstrate a good faith effort to comply with the filing requirement, is
subject to a civil penalty of not more than fifty thousand dollars.

(4) An order may not be
entered under subsection (3)(a) of this section if:

(a) The acquisition
will yield substantial economies of scale or economies in resource use that
cannot be feasibly achieved in any other way, and the public benefits that
would arise from the economies exceed the public benefits that would arise from
more competition; or

(b) The acquisition
will substantially increase the availability of health care coverage, and the
public benefits of the increase exceed the public benefits that would arise
from more competition.

(5)(a) Sections 8 (2)
and (3) and 9 of this act do not apply to acquisitions covered under this
section.

(b) This section does
not apply to the following:

(i) An acquisition
subject to approval or disapproval by the commissioner under section 3 of this
act;

(ii) A purchase of
securities solely for investment purposes so long as the securities are not
used by voting or otherwise to cause or attempt to cause the substantial
lessening of competition in the health coverage business in this state;

(iii) The acquisition
of a person by another person when neither person is directly, nor through
affiliates, primarily engaged in the business of a domestic or foreign health
carrier, if preacquisition notification is filed with the commissioner in
accordance with subsection (1) of this section sixty days before the proposed
effective date of the acquisition. However, preacquisition notification is not
required for exclusion from this section if the acquisition would otherwise be
excluded from this section by this subsection (5)(b);

(iv) The acquisition of
already affiliated persons;

(v) An acquisition if,
as an immediate result of the acquisition:

(A) In no market would
the combined market share of the involved carriers exceed five percent of the
total market;

(B) There would be no
increase in any market share; or

(C) In no market would:

(I) The combined market
share of the involved carriers exceed twelve percent of the total market; and

(II) The market share
increase by more than two percent of the total market.

For the purpose of
(b)(v) of this subsection, "market" means direct written premium in
this state for a line of business as contained in the annual statement required
to be filed by carriers licensed to do business in this state;

(vi) An acquisition of
a health carrier whose domiciliary commissioner affirmatively finds: That the
health carrier is in failing condition; there is a lack of feasible
alternatives to improving such a condition; and the public benefits of
improving the health carrier's condition through the acquisition exceed the
public benefits that would arise from more competition, and the findings are
communicated by the domiciliary commissioner to the commissioner of this state.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
3. (1) No person may acquire
control of a domestic health carrier unless the person has filed with the
commissioner and has sent to the health carrier a statement containing the
information required by this section and the acquisition has been approved by
the commissioner as prescribed in this section.

(2) The statement to be
filed with the commissioner under this section must be made under oath or
affirmation and must contain the following information:

(a) The name and
address of the acquiring party. For purposes of this section, "acquiring
party" means each person by whom or on whose behalf the acquisition of
control under subsection (1) of this section is to be effected:

(i) If the acquiring
party is an individual, his or her principal occupation and all offices and
positions held during the past five years, and any conviction of crimes other
than minor traffic violations during the past ten years;

(ii) If the acquiring
party is not an individual, a report of the nature of its business operations
during the past five years or for such lesser period as the person and any
predecessors have been in existence; an informative description of the business
intended to be done by the person's subsidiaries; any convictions of crimes
during the past ten years; and a list of all individuals who are or who have
been selected to become directors, trustees, or executive officers of the
person, or who perform or will perform functions appropriate to those positions.
The list must include for each such individual the information required by
(a)(i) of this subsection.

(b) The source, nature,
and amount of the consideration used or to be used in effecting the acquisition
of control, a description of any transaction in which funds were or are to be
obtained for any such purpose, including a pledge of assets, a pledge of the
health carrier's stock, or the stock of any of its subsidiaries or controlling
affiliates, and the identity of persons furnishing the consideration. However,
where a source of the consideration is a loan made in the lender's ordinary
course of business, the identity of the lender must remain confidential if the
person filing the statement so requests.

(c) Fully audited
financial information as to the earnings and financial condition of each
acquiring party for the preceding five fiscal years of each acquiring party, or
for such lesser period as the acquiring party and any predecessors have been in
existence, and similar unaudited information as of a date not earlier than
ninety days before the filing of the statement. If the acquiring party and any
predecessor has not had fully audited financial statements prepared during any
of the preceding five years, then reviewed financial statements may be
substituted for those years, except for the latest fiscal year which must be
fully audited financial statements.

(d) Any plans or
proposals that each acquiring party may have to liquidate the health carrier,
to sell its assets or merge or consolidate it with any person, or to make any
other material change in its business or corporate structure or management.

(e) The number of
shares of any security or number and description of other voting rights
referred to in section 1(3) of this act that each acquiring party proposes to
acquire, the terms of the offer, request, invitation, agreement, or acquisition
under section 1(3) of this act, and a statement as to the method by which the
fairness of the proposal was arrived at.

(f) The amount of each
class of any security referred to in section 1(3) of this act that is
beneficially owned or concerning which there is a right to acquire beneficial
ownership by each acquiring party.

(g) A full description
of any contracts, arrangements, or understandings with respect to any security
referred to in section 1(3) of this act in which an acquiring party is
involved, including but not limited to transfer of any of the securities, joint
ventures, loan or option arrangements, puts or calls, guarantees of loans,
guarantees against loss or guarantees of profits, division of losses or
profits, or the giving or withholding of proxies. The description must
identify the persons with whom the contracts, arrangements, or understandings
have been entered into.

(h) A description of
the purchase of any security referred to in section 1(3) of this act during the
twelve calendar months before the filing of the statement, by an acquiring
party, including the dates of purchase, names of the purchasers, and
consideration paid or agreed to be paid for the security.

(i) A description of
any recommendations to purchase any security referred to in section 1(3) of
this act made during the twelve calendar months before the filing of the
statement, by an acquiring party, or by anyone based upon interviews with
outside parties or at the suggestion of the acquiring party.

(j) Copies of all
tender offers for, requests or invitations for tenders of, exchange offers for,
and agreements to acquire or exchange any securities referred to in section 1(3)
of this act, and, if distributed, of additional soliciting material relating to
the securities.

(k) The term of an
agreement, contract, or understanding made with or proposed to be made with a
broker‑dealer as to solicitation or securities referred to in section
1(3) of this act for tender, and the amount of fees, commissions, or other
compensation to be paid to broker‑dealers with regard to the securities.

(l) Such additional
information as the commissioner may prescribe by rule as necessary or appropriate
for the protection of subscribers of the health carrier or in the public
interest.

If the person required
to file the statement referred to in subsection (1) of this section is a
partnership, limited partnership, syndicate, or other group, the commissioner
may require that the information required under (a) through (l) of this
subsection must be given with respect to each partner of the partnership or
limited partnership, each member of the syndicate or group, and each person who
controls a partner or member. If a partner, member, or person is a
corporation, or the person required to file the statement referred to in
subsection (1) of this section is a corporation, the commissioner may require
that the information required under (a) through (l) of this subsection must be
given with respect to the corporation, each officer and director of the
corporation, and each person who is directly or indirectly the beneficial owner
of more than ten percent of the outstanding voting securities of the corporation.

If a material change
occurs in the facts set forth in the statement filed with the commissioner and
sent to the health carrier under this section, an amendment setting forth the
change, together with copies of all documents and other material relevant to
the change, must be filed with the commissioner and sent to the health carrier
within two business days after the person learns of the change.

(3) If an offer,
request, invitation, agreement, or acquisition referred to in subsection (1) of
this section is proposed to be made by means of a registration statement under
the Securities Act of 1933 or in circumstances requiring the disclosure of
similar information under the Securities Exchange Act of 1934, or under a state
law requiring similar registration or disclosure, the person required to file
the statement referred to in subsection (1) of this section may use those
documents in furnishing the information called for by that statement.

(4) The commissioner
shall approve an exchange or other acquisition of control referred to in this
section within sixty days after he or she declares the statement filed under
this section to be complete and if a hearing is requested by the commissioner or
either party to the transaction, after holding a public hearing. Unless the
commissioner declares the statement to be incomplete and requests additional
information, the statement is deemed complete sixty days after receipt of the
statement by the commissioner. If the commissioner declares the statement to
be incomplete and requests additional information, the sixty-day time period in
which the statement is deemed complete shall be tolled until fifteen days after
receipt by the commissioner of the additional information. If the commissioner
declares the statement to be incomplete, the commissioner shall promptly notify
the person filing the statement of the filing deficiencies and shall set forth
with specificity the additional information required to make the filing
complete. At the hearing, the person filing the statement, the health carrier,
and any person whose significant interest is determined by the commissioner to
be affected may present evidence, examine and cross‑examine witnesses,
and offer oral and written arguments, and in connection therewith may conduct
discovery proceedings in the same manner as is allowed in the superior court of
this state. All discovery proceedings must be concluded not later than three
business days before the commencement of the public hearing.

(5)(a) The commissioner
shall approve an acquisition of control referred to in subsection (1) of this
section unless, after a public hearing, he or she finds that:

(i) After the change of
control, the domestic health carrier referred to in subsection (1) of this
section would not be able to satisfy the requirements for registration as a
health carrier;

(ii) The antitrust
section of the office of the attorney general and any federal antitrust
enforcement agency has chosen not to undertake a review of the proposed
acquisition and the commissioner pursuant to his or her own review finds that
there is substantial evidence that the effect of the acquisition may
substantially lessen competition or tend to create a monopoly in the health
coverage business.

If the antitrust
section of the office of the attorney general does not undertake a review of
the proposed acquisition and the review is being conducted by the commissioner,
then the commissioner shall seek input from the attorney general throughout the
review.

If the antitrust
section of the office of the attorney general undertakes a review of the
proposed transaction then the attorney general shall seek input from the
commissioner throughout the review. As to the commissioner, in making this
determination:

(A) The informational
requirements of section 2(1)(a) of this act apply;

(B) The commissioner
may not disapprove the acquisition if the commissioner finds that:

(I) The acquisition
will yield substantial economies of scale or economies in resource use that
cannot be feasibly achieved in any other way, and the public benefits that
would arise from the economies exceed the public benefits that would arise from
more competition; or

(II) The acquisition
will substantially increase or will prevent significant deterioration in the
availability of health care coverage, and the public benefits of the increase
exceed the public benefits that would arise from more competition;

(C) The commissioner
may condition the approval of the acquisition on the removal of the basis of
disapproval, as follows, within a specified period of time:

(I) The financial
condition of an acquiring party is such as might jeopardize the financial
stability of the health carrier, or prejudice the interest of its subscribers;

(II) The plans or
proposals that the acquiring party has to liquidate the health carrier, sell
its assets, consolidate or merge it with any person, or to make any other
material change in its business or corporate structure or management, are
unfair and unreasonable to subscribers of the health carrier and not in the
public interest;

(III) The competence,
experience, and integrity of those persons who would control the operation of
the health carrier are such that it would not be in the interest of subscribers
of the health carrier and of the public to permit the merger or other
acquisition of control; or

(IV) The acquisition is
likely to be hazardous or prejudicial to the insurance‑buying public.

(b) The commissioner
may retain at the acquiring person's expense any attorneys, actuaries,
accountants, and other experts not otherwise a part of the commissioner's staff
as may be reasonably necessary to assist the commissioner in reviewing the
proposed acquisition of control. All reasonable costs of a hearing held under
this section, as determined by the commissioner, including reasonable costs
associated with the commissioner's use of investigatory, professional, and
other necessary personnel, mailing of required notices and other information,
and use of equipment or facilities, must be paid before issuance of the
commissioner's order by the acquiring person.

(c) The commissioner
may condition approval of an acquisition on the removal of the basis of
disapproval within a specified period of time.

(6) Upon the request of
a party to the acquisition the commissioner may order that this section does
not apply to an offer, request, invitation, agreement, or acquisition as:

(a) Not having been
made or entered into for the purpose and not having the effect of changing or
influencing the control of a domestic health carrier; or

(b) Otherwise not
comprehended within the purposes of this section.

(7) The following are
violations of this section:

(a) The failure to file
a statement, amendment, or other material required to be filed under subsection
(1) or (2) of this section; or

(b) The effectuation or
an attempt to effectuate an acquisition of control of a domestic health carrier
unless the commissioner has given approval.

(8) The courts of this
state have jurisdiction over every person not resident, domiciled, or
authorized to do business in this state who files a statement with the
commissioner under this section, and over all actions involving that person
arising out of violations of this section, and such a person has performed acts
equivalent to and constituting an appointment by that person of the
commissioner to be the person's true and lawful attorney upon whom may be
served all lawful process in an action, suit, or proceeding arising out of
violations of this section. Copies of all such lawful process shall be served
on the commissioner and transmitted by registered or certified mail by the
commissioner to such a person at the person's last known address.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
4. (1) Every health carrier
registered to do business in this state that is a member of a health carrier
holding company system shall register with the commissioner, except a foreign
health carrier subject to registration requirements and standards adopted by
statute or regulation in the jurisdiction of its domicile that are
substantially similar to those contained in:

(a) This section;

(b) Sections 5(1) and 6
of this act; and

(c) Either section
5(1)(b) of this act or a provision such as the following: Each registered
health carrier shall keep current the information required to be disclosed in
its registration statement by reporting all material changes or additions
within fifteen days after the end of the month in which it learns of each
change or addition.

A health carrier
subject to registration under this section shall register within one hundred
twenty days of the effective date of this act and thereafter within fifteen
days after it becomes subject to registration, and annually thereafter by May
15th of each year for the previous calendar year, unless the commissioner for
good cause shown extends the time for registration, and then within the
extended time. The commissioner may require a health carrier authorized to do business
in the state that is a member of a health carrier holding company system, but
that is not subject to registration under this section, to furnish a copy of
the registration statement, the summary specified in subsection (3) of this
section, or other information filed by the health carrier with the regulatory
authority of its domiciliary jurisdiction.

(2) A health carrier
subject to registration shall file the registration statement on a form
prescribed by the commissioner, containing the following current information:

(a) The capital
structure, general financial condition, ownership, and management of the health
carrier and any person controlling the health carrier;

(b) The identity and
relationship of every member of the health carrier holding company system;

(c) The following
agreements in force, and transactions currently outstanding or that have
occurred during the last calendar year between the health carrier and its
affiliates:

(i) Loans, other
investments, or purchases, sales, or exchanges of securities of the affiliates
by the health carrier or of the health carrier by its affiliates;

(ii) Purchases, sales,
or exchange of assets;

(iii) Transactions not
in the ordinary course of business;

(iv) Guarantees or
undertakings for the benefit of an affiliate that result in an actual
contingent exposure of the health carrier's assets to liability, other than
subscriber contracts entered into in the ordinary course of the health
carrier's business;

(v) All management
agreements, service contracts, and cost‑sharing arrangements;

(vi) Reinsurance
agreements;

(vii) Dividends and
other distributions to shareholders; and

(viii) Consolidated tax
allocation agreements;

(d) Any pledge of the
health carrier's stock, including stock of a subsidiary or controlling
affiliate, for a loan made to a member of the health carrier holding company
system; and

(e) Other matters
concerning transactions between registered health carriers and affiliates as
may be included from time to time in registration forms adopted or approved by
the commissioner by rule.

(3) Registration
statements must contain a summary outlining all items in the current
registration statement representing changes from the prior registration
statement.

(4) No information need
be disclosed on the registration statement filed under subsection (2) of this
section if the information is not material for the purposes of this section.
Unless the commissioner by rule or order provides otherwise, sales, purchases,
exchanges, loans or extensions of credit, investments, or guarantees, involving
two percent or less of a health carrier's admitted assets as of the 31st day of
the previous December are not material for purposes of this section.

(5) A person within a
health carrier holding company system subject to registration shall provide
complete and accurate information to a health carrier, where the information is
reasonably necessary to enable the health carrier to comply with this chapter.

(6) The commissioner
shall terminate the registration of a health carrier under this section that
demonstrates that it no longer is a member of a health carrier holding company
system.

(7) The commissioner
may require or allow two or more affiliated health carriers subject to
registration under this section to file a consolidated registration statement.

(8) The commissioner
may allow a health carrier registered to do business in this state and part of
a health carrier holding company system to register on behalf of an affiliated
health carrier that is required to register under subsection (1) of this
section and to file all information and material required to be filed under
this section.

(9) This section does
not apply to a health carrier, information, or transaction if, and to the
extent that, the commissioner by rule or order exempts the health carrier,
information, or transaction from this section.

(10) A person may file
with the commissioner a disclaimer of affiliation with an authorized health
carrier, or a health carrier or a member of a health carrier holding company
system may file the disclaimer. The disclaimer must fully disclose all
material relationships and bases for affiliation between the person and the
health carrier as well as the basis for disclaiming the affiliation. After a
disclaimer has been filed, the health carrier is relieved of any duty to
register or report under this section that may arise out of the health carrier's
relationship with the person unless and until the commissioner disallows the
disclaimer. The commissioner shall disallow the disclaimer only after
furnishing all parties in interest with notice and opportunity to be heard and
after making specific findings of fact to support the disallowance.

(11) Failure to file a
registration statement or a summary of the registration statement required by
this section within the time specified for the filing is a violation of this
section.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
5. (1) Transactions within a
health carrier holding company system to which a health carrier subject to
registration is a party are subject to the following standards:

(a) The terms must be
fair and reasonable;

(b) Charges or fees for
services performed must be fair and reasonable;

(c) Expenses incurred
and payment received must be allocated to the health carrier in conformity with
customary statutory accounting practices consistently applied;

(d) The books,
accounts, and records of each party to all such transactions must be so
maintained as to clearly and accurately disclose the nature and details of the
transactions, including such accounting information as is necessary to support
the reasonableness of the charges or fees to the respective parties; and

(e) The health
carrier's net worth after the transaction must exceed the health carrier's
company action level risk-based capital. In addition, the commissioner may
disapprove a transaction if the health carrier's risk-based capital net worth
is less than the product of 2.5 and the health carrier's authorized control
level risk-based capital and the commissioner reasonably believes that the
health carrier's net worth is at risk of falling below its company action level
risk-based capital due to anticipated future financial losses not reflected in
the risk-based capital calculation. This subsection (1)(e) does not prohibit
transactions that improve or help maintain the health carrier's net worth.

(2) The following
transactions, excepting those transactions which are subject to approval by the
commissioner elsewhere within this title, involving a domestic health carrier
and a person in its health carrier holding company system may not be entered
into unless the health carrier has notified the commissioner in writing of its
intention to enter into the transaction and the commissioner does not declare
the notice to be incomplete at least thirty days before, or such shorter period
as the commissioner may permit, and the commissioner has not disapproved it
within that period. Unless the commissioner declares the notice to be
incomplete and requests additional information, the notice is deemed complete
thirty days after receipt of the notice by the commissioner. If the
commissioner declares the notice to be incomplete, the thirty-day time period
in which the notice is deemed complete shall be tolled until fifteen days after
the receipt by the commissioner of the additional information:

(a) Sales, purchases,
exchanges, loans or extensions of credit, guarantees, or investments if the
transactions are equal to or exceed the lesser of (i) two months of the health
carrier's annualized claims and administrative costs, (ii) five percent of the
health carrier's admitted assets, or (iii) twenty‑five percent of net
worth, as of the 31st day of the previous December;

(b) Loans or extensions
of credit to any person who is not an affiliate, if the health carrier makes
the loans or extensions of credit with the agreement or understanding that the proceeds
of the transactions, in whole or in substantial part, are to be used to make
loans or extensions of credit to, to purchase assets of, or to make investments
in, an affiliate of the health carrier making the loans or extensions of
credit, if the transactions are equal to or exceed the lesser of (i) two months
of the health carrier's annualized claims and administrative costs, (ii) three
percent of the health carrier's admitted assets, or (iii) twenty‑five
percent of net worth, as of the 31st day of the previous December;

(c) Reinsurance
agreements or modifications to them in which the reinsurance premium or a
change in the health carrier's liabilities equals or exceeds five percent of
the health carrier's net worth, as of the 31st day of the previous December,
including those agreements that may require as consideration the transfer of
assets from a health carrier to a nonaffiliate, if an agreement or
understanding exists between the health carrier and nonaffiliate that any
portion of the assets will be transferred to one or more affiliates of the
health carrier;

(d) Management
agreements, service contracts, and cost‑sharing arrangements; and

(e) Other acquisitions
or dispositions of assets involving more than five percent of the health
carrier's admitted assets, specified by rule, that the commissioner determines
may adversely affect the interests of the health carrier's subscribers.

(3) A domestic health
carrier may not enter into transactions that are part of a plan or series of
like transactions with persons within the health carrier holding company system
if the aggregate amount of the transactions within a twelve-month period exceed
the statutory threshold amount. If the commissioner determines that the
separate transactions entered into over a twelve‑month period exceed the
statutory threshold amount, the commissioner may apply for an order as
described in section 8(1) of this act.

(4) The commissioner,
in reviewing transactions under subsection (2) of this section, shall consider
whether the transactions comply with the standards set forth in subsection (1)
of this section.

(5) If a health carrier
complies with the terms of a management agreement, service contract, or
cost-sharing agreement that has not been disapproved by the commissioner under
subsection (2) of this section, then the health carrier is not required to
obtain additional approval from the commissioner for individual transactions
conducted under the terms of the management agreement, service contract, or
cost-sharing agreement. The commissioner, however, retains the authority to
examine the individual transactions to determine their compliance with the
terms of the management agreement, service contract, or cost-sharing agreement
and subsection (1) of this section.

(6) This section does
not authorize or permit a transaction that, in the case of a health carrier not
a member of the same health carrier holding company system, would be otherwise
contrary to law.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
6. (1)(a) Subject to
subsection (2) of this section, each registered health carrier shall report to
the commissioner all dividends and other distributions to shareholders or
members not within the ordinary course of business within five business days
after their declaration and at least fifteen business days before payment and
shall provide the commissioner such other information as may be required by
rule.

(b) Any payment of a
dividend or other distribution to shareholders or members which would reduce
the net worth of the health carrier below the greater of (i) the minimum
required by RCW 48.44.037 for a health care service contractor or RCW 48.46.235
for a health maintenance organization or (ii) the company action level RBC
under RCW 48.43.300(9)(a) is prohibited.

(2)(a) No domestic
health carrier may pay an extraordinary dividend or make any other
extraordinary distribution to its shareholders or members until: (i) Thirty
days after the commissioner has received sufficient notice of the declaration,
unless the commissioner declares the notice to be incomplete and requests
additional information in which event the thirty days shall be tolled until
fifteen days after receipt by the commissioner of the additional information or
thirty days after the original receipt of the notice by the commissioner,
whichever is later, and the commissioner has not within that period disapproved
the payment; or (ii) the commissioner has approved the payment within the
thirty-day period.

(b) For purposes of
this section, an extraordinary dividend or distribution is a dividend or
distribution of cash or other property whose fair market value, together with
that of other dividends or distributions not within the ordinary course of
business made within the period of twelve consecutive months ending on the date
on which the proposed dividend is scheduled for payment or distribution,
exceeds the lesser of: (i) Ten percent of the health carrier's net worth as of
the 31st day of the previous December; or (ii) the net income of the health
carrier for the twelve-month period ending the 31st day of the previous
December, but does not include pro rata distributions of any class of the
company's own securities.

(c) Notwithstanding any
other provision of law, a health carrier may declare an extraordinary dividend
or distribution that is conditional upon the commissioner's approval. The
declaration confers no rights upon shareholders or members until: (i) The commissioner
has approved the payment of the dividend or distribution; or (ii) the
commissioner has not disapproved the payment within the thirty‑day period
referred to in (a) of this subsection.

(3) For the purpose of
this section, "distribution" means a direct or indirect transfer of
money or other property, except its own shares, or incurrence of indebtedness
by a health carrier to or for the benefit of its members or shareholders in
respect to any of its shares. A distribution may be in the form of a declaration
or payment of a dividend; a distribution in partial or complete liquidation, or
upon voluntary or involuntary dissolution; a purchase, redemption, or other
acquisition of shares; or a distribution of indebtedness in respect to any of
its shares. It does not include any remuneration to a shareholder or member
made as consideration for services or items provided by such shareholder or
member, including but not limited to remuneration in exchange for health care
services, equipment or supplies, or administrative support services or
equipment.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
7. (1) Subject to the
limitation contained in this section and in addition to the powers that the
commissioner has under RCW 48.44.145 relating to the examination of health care
service contractors and under RCW 48.46.120 relating to the examination of
health maintenance organizations, the commissioner also may order a health
carrier registered under section 4 of this act to produce such records, books,
or other information papers in the possession of the health carrier or its
affiliates as are reasonably necessary to ascertain the financial condition of
the health carrier or to determine compliance with this title. If the health
carrier fails to comply with the order, the commissioner may examine the
affiliates to obtain the information.

(2) The commissioner
may retain at the registered health carrier's expense those attorneys,
actuaries, accountants, and other experts not otherwise a part of the
commissioner's staff as are reasonably necessary to assist in the conduct of
the examination under subsection (1) of this section. Persons so retained are
under the direction and control of the commissioner and shall act in a purely
advisory capacity.

(3) Each registered health
carrier producing for examination records, books, and papers under subsection
(1) of this section are liable for and shall pay the expense of the examination
in accordance with RCW 48.03.060.

(4) Chapter 48.03 RCW
applies to this chapter except to the extent expressly modified by this
chapter.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
8. (1) Whenever it appears
to the commissioner that a health carrier or a director, officer, employee, or
agent of the health carrier has committed or is about to commit a violation of
this chapter or any rule or order of the commissioner under this chapter, the
commissioner may apply to the superior court for Thurston county or to the
court for the county in which the principal office of the health carrier is located
for an order enjoining the health carrier or the director, officer, employee,
or agent from violating or continuing to violate this chapter or any such rule
or order, and for such other equitable relief as the nature of the case and the
interest of the health carrier's subscribers or the public may require.

(2) No security that is
the subject of an agreement or arrangement regarding acquisition, or that is
acquired or to be acquired, in contravention of this chapter or of a rule or
order of the commissioner under this chapter may be voted at a shareholders'
meeting, or may be counted for quorum purposes. Any action of shareholders
requiring the affirmative vote of a percentage of shares may be taken as though
the securities were not issued and outstanding, but no action taken at any such
meeting may be invalidated by the voting of the securities, unless the action
would materially affect control of the health carrier or unless the courts of
this state have so ordered. If a health carrier or the commissioner has reason
to believe that a security of the health carrier has been or is about to be
acquired in contravention of this chapter or of a rule or order of the
commissioner under this chapter, the health carrier or the commissioner may
apply to the superior court for Thurston county or to the court for the county
in which the health carrier has its principal place of business to enjoin an
offer, request, invitation, agreement, or acquisition made in contravention of
section 3 of this act or a rule or order of the commissioner under that section
to enjoin the voting of a security so acquired, to void a vote of the security
already cast at a meeting of shareholders, and for such other relief as the
nature of the case and the interest of the health carrier's subscribers or the
public may require.

(3) If a person has
acquired or is proposing to acquire voting securities in violation of this
chapter or a rule or order of the commissioner under this chapter, the superior
court for Thurston county or the court for the county in which the health
carrier has its principal place of business may, on such notice as the court
deems appropriate, upon the application of the health carrier or the
commissioner seize or sequester voting securities of the health carrier owned
directly or indirectly by the person, and issue such order with respect to the
securities as may be appropriate to carry out this chapter.

(4) Notwithstanding any
other provisions of law, for the purposes of this chapter, the situs of the
ownership of the securities of domestic health carriers is in this state.

(5) Subsections (2) and
(3) of this section do not apply to acquisitions under section 2 of this act.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
9. (1) The commissioner may
require, after notice and hearing, a health carrier failing, without just
cause, to file a registration statement as required in this chapter, to pay a
penalty of not more than ten thousand dollars per day. The maximum penalty
under this section is one million dollars. The commissioner may reduce the
penalty if the health carrier demonstrates to the commissioner that the
imposition of the penalty would constitute a financial hardship to the health
carrier. The commissioner shall transfer a fine collected under this section
to the state treasurer for deposit into the general fund.

(2) Every director or
officer of a health carrier holding company system who knowingly violates this
chapter, or participates in, or assents to, or who knowingly permits an officer
or agent of the health carrier to engage in transactions or make investments
that have not been properly reported or submitted under section 4(1), 5(2), or
6 of this act, or that violate this chapter, shall pay, in their individual
capacity, a civil forfeiture of not more than ten thousand dollars per
violation, after notice and hearing. In determining the amount of the civil
forfeiture, the commissioner shall take into account the appropriateness of the
forfeiture with respect to the gravity of the violation, the history of
previous violations, and such other matters as justice may require.

(3) Whenever it appears
to the commissioner that a health carrier subject to this chapter, or a
director, officer, employee, or agent of the health carrier, has engaged in a
transaction or entered into a contract that is subject to sections 5 and 6 of
this act and that would not have been approved had approval been requested, the
commissioner may order the health carrier to cease and desist immediately any
further activity under that transaction or contract. After notice and hearing
the commissioner may also order the health carrier to void any such contracts
and restore the status quo if that action is in the best interest of the
subscribers or the public.

(4) Whenever it appears
to the commissioner that a health carrier or a director, officer, employee, or
agent of the health carrier has committed a willful violation of this chapter,
the commissioner may refer the matter to the prosecuting attorney of Thurston
county or the county in which the principal office of the health carrier is
located. A health carrier that willfully violates this chapter may be fined
not more than one million dollars. Any individual who willfully violates this
chapter may be fined in his or her individual capacity not more than ten
thousand dollars, or be imprisoned for not more than three years, or both.

(5) An officer,
director, or employee of a health carrier holding company system who willfully
and knowingly subscribes to or makes or causes to be made a false statement,
false report, or false filing with the intent to deceive the commissioner in
the performance of his or her duties under this chapter, upon conviction
thereof, shall be imprisoned for not more than three years or fined not more than
ten thousand dollars or both. The officer, director, or employee upon whom the
fine is imposed shall pay the fine in his or her individual capacity.

(6) This section does
not apply to acquisitions under section 2 of this act.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
10. Whenever it appears to
the commissioner that a person has committed a violation of this chapter that
so impairs the financial condition of a domestic health carrier as to threaten
insolvency or make the further transaction of business by it hazardous to its
subscribers or the public, the commissioner may proceed as provided in RCW
48.31.030 and 48.31.040 to take possession of the property of the domestic
health carrier and to conduct the business of the health carrier.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
11. (1) If an order for
liquidation or rehabilitation of a domestic health carrier has been entered,
the receiver appointed under the order may recover on behalf of the health
carrier:

(a) From a parent
corporation or a holding company, a person, or an affiliate, who otherwise
controlled the health carrier, the amount of distributions, other than
distributions of shares of the same class of stock, paid by the health carrier
on its capital stock; or

(b) A payment in the
form of a bonus, termination settlement, or extraordinary lump sum salary
adjustment, made by the health carrier or its subsidiary to a director,
officer, or employee;

Where the distribution or
payment under (a) or (b) of this subsection is made at anytime during the one
year before the petition for liquidation, conservation, or rehabilitation, as
the case may be, subject to the limitations of subsections (2) through (4) of
this section.

(2) No such
distribution is recoverable if it is shown that when paid, the distribution was
lawful and reasonable, and that the health carrier did not know and could not
reasonably have known that the distribution might adversely affect the ability
of the health carrier to fulfill its contractual obligations.

(3) A person who was a
parent corporation, a holding company, or a person, who otherwise controlled
the health carrier, or an affiliate when the distributions were paid, is liable
up to the amount of distributions or payments under subsection (1) of this
section the person received. A person who controlled the health carrier at the
time the distributions were declared is liable up to the amount of
distributions he or she would have received if they had been paid immediately.
If two or more persons are liable with respect to the same distributions, they
are jointly and severally liable.

(4) The maximum amount
recoverable under this section is the amount needed in excess of all other
available assets of the impaired or insolvent health carrier to pay the
contractual obligations of the impaired or insolvent health carrier.

(5) To the extent that
a person liable under subsection (3) of this section is insolvent or otherwise
fails to pay claims due from it under those provisions, its parent corporation,
holding company, or person, who otherwise controlled it at the time the
distribution was paid, is jointly and severally liable for a resulting
deficiency in the amount recovered from the parent corporation, holding
company, or person, who otherwise controlled it.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
12. Whenever it appears to
the commissioner that a person has committed a violation of this chapter that
makes the continued operation of a health carrier contrary to the interests of
subscribers or the public, the commissioner may, after giving notice and an
opportunity to be heard, suspend, revoke, or refuse to renew the health
carrier's registration to do business in this state for such period as he or
she finds is required for the protection of subscribers or the public. Such a
suspension, revocation, or refusal to renew the health carrier's registration
must be accompanied by specific findings of fact and conclusions of law.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
13. Confidential proprietary
and trade secret information provided to the commissioner under sections 2
through 5 and 7 of this act are exempt from public inspection and copying and
shall not be subject to subpoena directed to the commissioner or any person who
received the confidential proprietary financial and trade secret information
while acting under the authority of the commissioner. This information shall
not be made public by the commissioner, the national association of insurance
commissioners, or any other person, except to insurance departments of other
states, without the prior written consent of the health carrier to which it
pertains unless the commissioner, after giving the health carrier that would be
affected by the disclosure notice and hearing under chapter 48.04 RCW,
determines that the interest of policyholders, subscribers, members,
shareholders, or the public will be served by the publication, in which event
the commissioner may publish information related to the transactions or filings
in the manner and time frame he or she reasonably deems appropriate and
sensitive to the interest in preserving confidential proprietary and trade
secret information. The commissioner is authorized to use such documents,
materials, or information in the furtherance of any regulatory or legal action
brought as part of the commissioner's official duties. The confidentiality
created by this act shall apply only to the commissioner, any person acting
under the authority of the commissioner, the national association of insurance
commissioners and its affiliates and subsidiaries, and the insurance
departments of other states.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
14. A new section is added
to chapter 42.17 RCW to read as follows:

Confidential
proprietary and trade secret information provided to the commissioner under
sections 2 through 5 and 7 of this act are exempt from disclosure under this
chapter.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
15. (1) A person aggrieved by
an act, determination, rule, order, or any other action of or failure to act by
the commissioner under this chapter may proceed in accordance with chapters
34.05 and 48.04 RCW.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
16. The commissioner may
adopt rules to implement and administer this chapter.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
17. If an insurance company
holding a certificate of authority from the commissioner under chapter 48.05
RCW is a member of both a health carrier holding company system under this
chapter and an insurance holding company system under chapter 48.31B RCW, then
chapter 48.31B RCW applies to the authorized insurance company.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
18. If any provision of this
act or its application to any person or circumstance is held invalid, the
remainder of the act or the application of the provision to other persons or
circumstances is not affected.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
19. This act is necessary for
the immediate preservation of the public peace, health, or safety, or support
of the state government and its existing public institutions, and takes effect
immediately.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 20. Sections 1 through 13 and
15 through 18 of this act constitute a new chapter in Title 48 RCW.

---
END ---