BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF
WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec.
1. A new section is added
to chapter 81.112 RCW to read as follows:

(1) Whenever a regional
transit authority chooses to deviate from a final system plan, or the
boundaries, timetable, or scope of work previously within that system plan, the
authority must submit the change or deviation to a vote of the people within
the service area as a ballot proposition setting forth the change and the
rationale for the change. A regional transit authority may not change the
final system plan, or the boundaries, timetable, or scope of work previously
within that system plan, without approval of a majority of those voting in the
election.

(2) At least once every
ten years, a regional transit authority must submit the current uncompleted
work to be undertaken in its current system plan, and the boundaries,
timetable, and scope of incomplete work within the system plan, to a vote of
the people within the service area as a ballot proposition on the continued
completion of the service plan. If the ballot proposition fails to receive a
majority vote of those voting in the election, the authority will cease further
work on the plan, but may maintain systems and modes of operation already in
effect prior to the vote. A vote pursuant to subsection (1) of this section
satisfies this requirement, but in no case may an authority go longer than ten
years between votes.

(3) If a
regional transit authority fails to comply with the provisions of subsections
(1) and (2) of this section, the taxing authority permitted under chapter
81.104 RCW expires, as well as any taxes imposed pursuant to chapter 81.104
RCW.

--- END ---