BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF
WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec.
1. A new section is added
to chapter 9.46 RCW to read as follows:

In any
legal action brought by a federally recognized Indian tribe against the state
of Washington seeking remedies set forth in the federal Indian gaming
regulatory act of 1988, 25 U.S.C. Sec. 2701 et seq., or seeking the enforcement
of the terms of a tribal/state compact adopted under the federal Indian gaming
regulatory act of 1988, 25 U.S.C. Sec. 2701 et seq. for, the state hereby
consents to the jurisdiction of the United States district court for the
eastern or western district of Washington or the state court in which the
action was commenced, conditioned upon a similar limited waiver of sovereign
immunity by the Indian tribe bringing such action. This limited waiver of
sovereign immunity shall not extend to any actions other than those expressly
set forth in this section.

--- END ---