BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF
WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec.
1. The purpose of section 2
of this act is to ensure that a taxpayer is not required to pay property taxes
to more than one taxing district for fire protection bond levies, when part of
a fire protection district is merged with another district, or annexed to or
incorporated into a city or town. Section 2 of this act is intended to provide
equitable adjustment of bonded indebtedness between taxing districts in these
circumstances while protecting the security of bondholders.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
2. A new section is added
to chapter 52.06 RCW to read as follows:

(1) When a part of a
fire protection district is transferred and merged with an adjacent fire
protection district, or annexed to or incorporated into a city or town, the bonded
indebtedness outstanding against the merging district shall be adjusted
equitably between the merging district and the merger district as provided in
this section.

(2) For the purposes of
this section, the merging district is the district from which the property is
removed and the merger district is the district, city, or town in which the
property is merged, annexed, or incorporated.

(3) The county
legislative authority of each county containing the merging and merger
districts shall establish the terms of adjustment of the bonded indebtedness
and shall provide and specify:

(a) When bonded
indebtedness is transferred from one district to another district:

(i) That such bonded
indebtedness is assumed by the district to which it is transferred;

(ii) That thereafter
such bonded indebtedness shall be the obligation of the district to which it is
transferred;

(iii) That, if the
terms of adjustment so provide, any bonded indebtedness thereafter incurred by
the merger district through the sale of bonds authorized before the date its
boundaries were altered shall be the obligation of such district including the
territory added thereto; and

(iv) That taxes shall
be levied thereafter against the taxable property located within such district
as it is constituted after its boundaries were altered, the taxes to be levied
at the times and in the amounts required to pay the principal of and the
interest on the bonded indebtedness assumed or incurred, as the same become due
and payable.

(b) In computing the
debt limitation of any district from which or to which bonded indebtedness has
been transferred, the amount of transferred bonded indebtedness at any time
outstanding:

(i) Shall be an offset
against and deducted from the total bonded indebtedness, if any, of the
district from which the bonded indebtedness was transferred; and

(ii) Shall be deemed to
be bonded indebtedness solely of the district that assumed the indebtedness.

(c) When adjustments of
bonded indebtedness do not provide for transfer of bonded indebtedness from one
district to another district:

(i) That the existing
bonded indebtedness of each district, the boundaries of which are altered and
any bonded indebtedness incurred by each such district through the sale of
bonds authorized before the date its boundaries were altered is the obligation
of the district in its reduced or enlarged form, as the case may be; and

(ii) That taxes shall
be levied thereafter against the taxable property located within each such
district in its reduced or enlarged form, as the case may be, at the times and
in the amounts required to pay the principal of and interest on such bonded
indebtedness as the same become due and payable.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
3. A new section is added
to chapter 35.02 RCW to read as follows:

When a part of a fire
protection district is incorporated into a city or town, the bonded
indebtedness outstanding against the district shall be adjusted equitably
between the district and city or town as provided in section 2 of this act.
When bonded indebtedness is transferred under section 2 of this act to the
incorporating city or town, the transferred bonded indebtedness becomes the
obligation of the annexing city or town.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
4. A new section is added
to chapter 35.13 RCW to read as follows:

When a part of a fire
protection district is annexed to a city or town, the bonded indebtedness
outstanding against the district shall be adjusted equitably between the
district and city or town as provided in section 2 of this act. When bonded
indebtedness is transferred under section 2 of this act to the annexing city or
town, the transferred bonded indebtedness becomes the obligation of the
annexing city or town.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
5. A new section is added
to chapter 35A.14 RCW to read as follows:

When a
part of a fire protection district is annexed to a code city or town, the
bonded indebtedness outstanding against the district shall be adjusted
equitably between the district and code city as provided in section 2 of this
act. When bonded indebtedness is transferred under section 2 of this act to
the annexing code city, the transferred bonded indebtedness becomes the
obligation of the annexing code city.

---
END ---