BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF
WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec.
1. It is the intent of this
act to provide retirees of local government employers access to health care
benefits. It is also the intent of this act that local government employers be
allowed the flexibility to design programs to meet the health care needs of
their retirees and that the local government employer be able to recover all
costs associated with providing retirees access to health benefits.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
2. A new section is added
to chapter 41.04 RCW to read as follows:

(1) Unless the context
clearly requires otherwise, the definitions in this subsection apply throughout
this section.

(a) "Disabled
employee" means an individual eligible to receive a disability retirement
allowance from the public employees' retirement system.

(b) "Health
plan" means a contract, policy, fund, trust, or other program established
jointly or individually by a county, municipality, or other political
subdivision of the state that provides for all or a part of hospitalization or
medical aid for its employees and their dependents under RCW 41.04.180.

(c) "Retired
employee" means a public employee meeting the retirement eligibility,
years of service requirements, and other criteria set forth in the public
employees' retirement system.

(2) A county,
municipality, or other political subdivision that provides a health plan for
its employees shall permit retired and disabled employees and their dependents
to continue participation in a plan subject to the exceptions, limitations, and
conditions set forth in this section. However, this section does not apply to
a county, municipality, or other political subdivision participating in an
insurance program administered under chapter 41.05 RCW if retired and disabled
employees and their dependents of the participating county, municipality, or
other political subdivision are covered under an insurance program administered
under chapter 41.05 RCW. Nothing in this subsection or this act precludes the
local government employer from offering retired or disabled employees a health
plan with a benefit structure, copayment, deductible, coinsurance, lifetime
benefit maximum, and other plan features which differ from those offered
through a health plan provided to active employees. Further, nothing in this
subsection precludes a local government employer from joining with other public
agency employers, including interjurisdictional benefit pools and
multi-employer associations or consortiums, to fulfill its obligations under
this act.

(3) A county, municipality,
or other political subdivision has full authority to require a person who
requests continued participation in a health plan under subsection (2) of this
section to pay the full cost of such participation, including any amounts
necessary for administration. However, this subsection does not require an
employer who is currently paying for all or part of a health plan for its
retired and disabled employees to discontinue those payments.

(4) Payments for
continued participation in a former employer's health plan may be assigned to
the underwriter of the health plan from public pension benefits or may be paid
to the former employer, as determined by the former employer, so that an
underwriter of the health plan that is an insurance company, health care service
contractor, or health maintenance organization is not required to accept
individual payments from persons continuing participation in the employer's
health plan.

(5) After an initial
open enrollment period of ninety days after the effective date of this section,
an employer may not be required to permit a person to continue participation in
the health plan if the person is responsible for a lapse in coverage under the
plan. In addition, an employer may not be required to permit a person to
continue participation in the employer's health plan if the employer offered
continued participation in a health plan that meets the requirements of this
act.

(6) If a person
continuing participation in the former employer's health plan has medical
coverage available through another employer, the medical coverage of the other
employer is the primary coverage for purposes of coordination of benefits as
provided for in the former employer's health plan.

(7) If a person's
continued participation in a health plan was permitted because of the person's
relationship to a retired or disabled employee of the employer providing the
health plan and the retired or disabled employee dies, then that person is
permitted to continue participation in the health plan for a period of not more
than six months after the death of the retired or disabled employee. However,
the employer providing the health plan may permit continued participation
beyond that time period.

(8) An employer may
offer one or more health plans different from that provided for active
employees and designed to meet the needs of persons requesting continued
participation in the employer's health plan. An employer, in designing or
offering continued participation in a health plan, may utilize terms or
conditions necessary to administer the plan to the extent the terms and
conditions do not conflict with this section.

(9) If an employer
changes the underwriter of a health plan, the replaced underwriter has no
further responsibility or obligation to persons who continued participation in
a health plan of the replaced underwriter. However, the employer shall permit
those persons to participate in any new health plan.

(10) The benefits
granted under this section are not considered a matter of contractual right.
Should the legislature, a county, municipality, or other political subdivision
of the state revoke or change any benefits granted under this section, an
affected person is not entitled to receive the benefits as a matter of
contractual right.

(11) This section does
not affect any health plan contained in a collective bargaining agreement in
existence as of the effective date of this section. However, any plan
contained in future collective bargaining agreements shall conform to this
section. In addition, this section does not affect any health plan contract or
policy in existence as of the effective date of this section. However, any
renewal of the contract or policy shall conform to this section.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
3. A new section is added
to chapter 41.04 RCW to read as follows:

Employers providing
access to health insurance coverage under this act may adopt criteria which
specify allowable enrollment periods, require enrollees to keep current
addresses and information, and outline other processes to ensure that plans can
be administered efficiently and effectively.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
4. A new section is added
to chapter 41.04 RCW to read as follows:

The joint legislative
audit and review committee shall report on the impact of this act on local
governments, and evaluate this act's effectiveness in providing access to
affordable, quality health care coverage to local government retirees. The
report shall be submitted to the appropriate committees of the legislature by
December 1, 2008.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 5. This act takes effect
January 1, 2002. However, if a political subdivision is unable to structure a
health plan to meet the requirements of this act by January 1, 2002, additional
time of up to one year is allowed. All political subdivisions must implement
this act by January 1, 2003.

---
END ---