BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF
WASHINGTON:

_4 Sec. 1. RCW
35A.14.299 and 1967 ex.s. c 119 s 35A.14.299 are each

_5 amended to read as follows:

_6 Such annexation ordinance as provided for in RCW
35A.14.297

_7 shall be subject to referendum for forty-five days after
the

_8 passage thereof. Upon the filing of a timely and
sufficient

_9 referendum petition with the legislative body, signed by

10 ((qualified electors)) voters residing in the
area proposed to be

11 annexed in number equal to not less than ten
percent of the votes

12 cast in the last general state election in the area to
be annexed,

13 the question of annexation shall be submitted to the
voters of

14 ((such)) the area in a general election if
one is to be held

15 within ninety days or at a special election called for
that

16 purpose not less than forty-five days nor more than
ninety days

17 after the filing of the referendum petition. However,
if the area

18 proposed to be annexed under RCW 35A.14.295 is entirely
surrounded

p. 1 HB
1800

_1 by the city, a single ballot proposition authorizing
the

_2 annexation must be submitted to the voters of both
the city and

_3 the area proposed to be annexed. Notice of such
election shall be

_4 given as provided in RCW 35A.14.070 ((and the
election shall be

_5 conducted as provided in RCW 35A.14.060)). The
annexation shall be

_6 deemed approved by the voters unless a majority of the
votes cast

_7 on the proposition are in opposition thereto.

_8 After the expiration of the forty-fifth day from but
excluding

_9 the date of passage of the annexation ordinance, if no
timely and

10 sufficient referendum petition has been filed, the area
annexed

11 shall become a part of the code city upon the date fixed
in the

12 ordinance of annexation. From and after such date, if
the ordinance

13 so provided, property in the annexed area shall be
subject to the

14 proposed zoning regulation prepared and filed for such
area as

15 provided in RCW 35A.14.330 and 35A.14.340. If the
ordinance so

16 provided, all property within the area annexed shall be
assessed

17 and taxed at the same rate and on the same basis as the
property

18 of such annexing code city is assessed and taxed to pay
for any

19 then outstanding indebtedness of such city contracted
prior to, or

20 existing at, the date of annexation.

‑‑‑ END ‑‑‑

HB 1800 p. 2