BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF
WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec.
1. The legislature finds
that limiting competition for housing types, manufacturing methods, and housing
designs stifles housing choices, arbitrarily reduces competition, and increases
costs which in turn reduces housing affordability. These restrictions on the
siting of manufactured housing go beyond regulations needed to adequately
protect the life and safety of the citizens of the state. The legislature
further finds that manufactured housing built to federal standards should not
be prohibited or restrained beyond restraints or prohibitions placed on
site-built single-family residences, either through personal or public
restrictions, and that any such restrictions are contrary to the public policy
of the state that encourages housing affordability and consumer choice absent restraint
of trade by private or public entities.

Sec. 2. RCW 35.63.110 and 1965 c
7 s 35.63.110 are each amended to read as follows:

For any or all of such
purposes the council or board, on recommendation of its commission, may divide
the municipality or any portion thereof into districts of such size, shape and
area, or may establish such official maps, or development plans for the whole
or any portion of the municipality as may be deemed best suited to carry out
the purposes of this chapter and within such districts it may regulate and
restrict the erection, construction, reconstruction, alteration, repair or use
of buildings, structures, or land.

However, in any
zoning district for single-family residences, single-family designated
manufactured homes, as defined in RCW 35.63.160, that are thermally equivalent
to the state energy code, and new manufactured homes, as defined in RCW
35.63.160, shall be sited on individual lots subject only to land use
regulations applicable to all other single-family residences on individual lots
in such districts. This section does not prevent the adoption of home design
regulations to assure neighborhood compatibility provided such regulations
apply equally to homes regulated under the state building code and designated
manufactured homes and new manufactured homes, as defined in RCW 35.63.160.

Sec. 3. RCW 35.63.160 and 1988 c
239 s 1 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) ((Each
comprehensive plan which does not allow for the siting of manufactured homes on
individual lots shall be subject to a review by the city of the need and demand
for such homes. The review shall be completed by December 31, 1990.

(2) For the purpose
of providing an optional reference for cities which choose to allow
manufactured homes on individual lots,)) A "designated manufactured home" is a manufactured
home constructed after June 15, 1976, in accordance with state and federal
requirements for manufactured homes, which:

(a) Is comprised of at
least two fully enclosed parallel sections each of not less than twelve feet
wide by thirty-six feet long;

(b) Was originally
constructed with and now has a composition or wood shake or shingle, coated
metal, or similar roof of ((not less than)) nominal 3:12 pitch;
and

(c) Has exterior siding
similar in appearance to siding materials commonly used on conventional
site-built uniform building code single-family residences.

(2) "New
manufactured home" means any manufactured home required to be titled under
Title 46 RCW, which has not been previously titled to a retail purchaser, and
is not a "used mobile home" as defined in RCW 82.45.032(2).

(3) Nothing in this
section precludes cities from allowing any manufactured home from being sited
on individual lots through local standards which differ from the designated
manufactured home or new manufactured home as described in this section,
except that the term "designated manufactured home" and "new
manufactured home" shall not be used except as defined in subsections
(1) and (2) of this section.

Sec. 4. RCW 35A.63.100 and 1979
ex.s. c 170 s 8 are each amended to read as follows:

After approval of the
comprehensive plan, as set forth above, the legislative body, in developing the
municipality and in regulating the use of land, may implement or give effect to
the comprehensive plan or parts thereof by ordinance or other action to such
extent as the legislative body deems necessary or appropriate. Such ordinances
or other action may provide for:

(1) Adoption of an
official map and regulations relating thereto designating locations and
requirements for one or more of the following: Streets, parks, public
buildings, and other public facilities, and protecting such sites against
encroachment by buildings and other physical structures.

(2) Dividing the
municipality, or portions thereof, into appropriate zones within which specific
standards, requirements, and conditions may be provided for regulating the use
of public and private land, buildings, and structures, and the location,
height, bulk, number of stories, and size of buildings and structures, size of
yards, courts, open spaces, density of population, ratio of land area to the
area of buildings and structures, setbacks, area required for off-street
parking, protection of access to direct sunlight for solar energy systems, and
such other standards, requirements, regulations, and procedures as are
appropriately related thereto. The ordinance encompassing the matters of this subsection
is hereinafter called the "zoning ordinance". No zoning ordinance,
or amendment thereto, shall be enacted by the legislative body without at least
one public hearing, notice of which shall be given as set forth in RCW
35A.63.070. Such hearing may be held before the planning agency or the board
of adjustment or such other body as the legislative body shall designate.

However, in any
zoning district for single-family residences, single-family designated
manufactured homes, as defined in RCW 35A.63.145, that are thermally equivalent
to the state energy code, and new manufactured homes, as defined in RCW
35.63.160, shall be sited on individual lots subject only to land use
regulations applicable to all other single-family residences on individual lots
in such districts. This section does not prevent the adoption of home design
regulations to assure neighborhood compatibility provided such regulations
apply equally to homes regulated under the state building code and designated
manufactured homes and new manufactured homes, as defined in RCW 35A.63.145.

(3) Adoption of design
standards, requirements, regulations, and procedures for the subdivision of
land into two or more parcels, including, but not limited to, the approval of
plats, dedications, acquisitions, improvements, and reservation of sites for
public use.

(4) Scheduling public
improvements on the basis of recommended priorities over a period of years,
subject to periodic review.

(5) Such other matters
as may be otherwise authorized by law or as the legislative body deems
necessary or appropriate to effectuate the goals and objectives of the
comprehensive plan or parts thereof and the purposes of this chapter.

Sec. 5. RCW 35A.63.145 and 1988
c 239 s 2 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) ((Each
comprehensive plan which does not allow for the siting of manufactured homes on
individual lots shall be subject to a review by the city of the need and demand
for such homes. The review shall be completed by December 31, 1990.

(2) For the purpose
of providing an optional reference for cities which choose to allow
manufactured homes on individual lots,)) A "designated manufactured home" is a manufactured
home constructed after June 15, 1976, in accordance with state and federal
requirements for manufactured homes, which:

(a) Is comprised of at
least two fully enclosed parallel sections each of not less than twelve feet
wide by thirty-six feet long;

(b) Was originally
constructed with and now has a composition or wood shake or shingle, coated
metal, or similar roof of ((not less than)) nominal 3:12 pitch;
and

(c) Has exterior siding
similar in appearance to siding materials commonly used on conventional
site-built uniform building code single-family residences.

(2) "New
manufactured home" means any manufactured home required to be titled under
Title 46 RCW, which has not been previously titled to a retail purchaser, and
is not a "used mobile home" as defined in RCW 82.45.032(2).

(3) Nothing in this
section precludes cities from allowing any manufactured home from being sited
on individual lots through local standards which differ from the designated
manufactured home or new manufactured home as described in this section,
except that the term "designated manufactured home" and "new
manufactured home" shall not be used except as defined in subsections
(1) and (2) of this section.

Sec. 6. RCW 36.70.750 and 1963 c
4 s 36.70.750 are each amended to read as follows:

Any board, by
ordinance, may establish classifications, within each of which, specific
controls are identified, and which will:

(1) Regulate the use of
buildings, structures, and land as between agriculture, industry, business,
residence, and other purposes.

However, in any
zoning district for single-family residences, single-family designated
manufactured homes, as defined in RCW 35.63.160, that are thermally equivalent
to the state energy code, and new manufactured homes, as defined in RCW
35.63.160, shall be sited on individual lots subject only to land use regulations
applicable to all other single-family residences on individual lots in such
districts. This subsection does not prevent the adoption of home design
regulations to assure neighborhood compatibility provided such regulations
apply equally to homes regulated under the state building code and designated
manufactured homes and new manufactured homes, as defined in RCW 35.63.160;

(2) Regulate location,
height, bulk, number of stories and size of buildings and structures; the size
of yards, courts, and other open spaces; the density of population; the
percentage of a lot which may be occupied by buildings and structures; and the
area required to provide off-street facilities for the parking of motor
vehicles.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
7. A new section is added
to chapter 36.70A RCW to read as follows:

Any city or county that
plans or elects to plan under this chapter must allow in any zoning district
for single-family residences (1) single-family designated manufactured homes as
defined in RCW 35.63.160 or 35A.63.145, that are thermally equivalent to the
state energy code, (2) manufactured homes as defined in RCW 43.63B.010, and (3)
new manufactured homes as defined in RCW 35.63.160 or 35A.63.145, to be sited
on individual lots subject only to land use regulations applicable to all other
single-family residences on individual lots in such districts. This section
does not prevent the adoption of home design regulations to assure neighborhood
compatibility provided such regulations apply equally to homes regulated under
the state building code and designated manufactured homes, manufactured homes,
and new manufactured homes as defined in RCW 43.63B.010, 35.63.160, or
35A.63.145.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 8. This act takes effect
January 1, 2003.

---
END ---