BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF
WASHINGTON:

_7 Sec. 1. RCW
46.04.320 and 1961 c 12 s 46.04.320 are each amended

_8 to read as follows:

_9 "Motor vehicle" ((shall)) means
every vehicle which is self-

10 propelled and every vehicle which is propelled by
electric power

11 obtained from overhead trolley wires, but not operated
upon rails.

12 "Motor vehicle" includes a neighborhood
electric vehicle as

13 defined in section 2 of this act and operated
pursuant to section

14 3 of this act.

15 NEW SECTION. Sec. 2. A new section is
added to chapter 46.04

16 RCW to read as follows:

17 "Neighborhood electric vehicle" means a
self-propelled,

p. 1 HB
1802

_1 electrically powered four-wheeled motor vehicle that has
a speed

_2 attainable in one mile that does not exceed twenty-five
miles per

_3 hour and conforms to federal regulations under Title 49
C.F.R.

_4 Part 571.500.

_5 NEW SECTION. Sec. 3. A new section is
added to chapter 46.61

_6 RCW to read as follows:

_7 (1) Absent prohibition by local authorities
authorized under

_8 this section and except as prohibited elsewhere in this
section, a

_9 person may operate a neighborhood electric vehicle upon
a highway

10 of this state having a speed limit of thirty-five miles
per hour

11 or less as long as:

12 (a) A person does not operate a neighborhood
electric vehicle

13 upon streets and highways which are parts of the state
highway

14 system which are subject to the provisions of Title 47
RCW;

15 (b) A person does not operate a neighborhood
electric vehicle

16 upon a highway of this state without first having
obtained and

17 having in full force and effect a current and proper
vehicle

18 license and displays vehicle license number plates in compliance

19 with chapter 46.16 RCW;

20 (c) A person does not operate a neighborhood
electric vehicle

21 upon a highway of this state without first obtaining a
valid

22 driver's license issued to Washington residents in
compliance with

23 chapter 46.20 RCW;

24 (d) A person does not operate a neighborhood
electric vehicle

25 subject to registration under chapter 46.16 RCW on a
highway of

26 this state unless the person is insured under a motor
vehicle

27 liability policy in compliance with chapter 46.30 RCW;

28 (e) A person operating a neighborhood electric
vehicle does not

29 cross a roadway with a speed limit in excess of
thirty-five miles

30 per hour, unless the crossing begins and ends on a
roadway with a

31 speed limit of thirty-five miles per hour or less and
occurs at an

32 intersection of approximately ninety degrees, except
that the

33 operator of a neighborhood electric vehicle must not
cross an

34 uncontrolled intersection of streets and highways which
are part

35 of the state highway system subject to the provisions of
Title 47

36 RCW unless that intersection has been authorized by
local

37 authorities provided elsewhere in this section.

HB 1802 p. 2

_1 (2) Any person who violates this section commits a
traffic

_2 infraction.

_3 (3) The provisions of this section do not prevent
local

_4 authorities, with respect to streets and highways under
their

_5 jurisdiction and within the reasonable exercise of their
police

_6 power, from regulating the operation of neighborhood
electric

_7 vehicles on streets and highways under their
jurisdiction by

_8 resolution or ordinance of the governing body, if the
regulation

_9 is consistent with the provisions of this title, except
that:

10 (a) Local authorities may not authorize the operation
of

11 neighborhood electric vehicles on streets and highways
which are

12 part of the state highway system subject to the
provisions of

13 Title 47 RCW;

14 (b) Local authorities may not prohibit the operation
of

15 neighborhood electric vehicles upon highways of this
state having

16 a speed limit of twenty-five miles per hour or less;

17 (c) Local authorities are prohibited from
establishing any

18 requirements for the registration and licensing of
neighborhood

19 electric vehicles.

20 NEW SECTION. Sec. 4. This act takes effect
January 1, 2002.

‑‑‑ END ‑‑‑

p. 3 HB
1802