BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF
WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1. RCW 79.90.465 and 1984 c
221 s 4 are each amended to read as follows:

The definitions in this
section apply throughout chapters 79.90 through 79.96 RCW.

(1)
"Water-dependent use" means a use which cannot logically exist in any
location but on the water. Examples include, but are not limited to,
water-borne commerce; terminal and transfer facilities; ferry terminals;
watercraft sales in conjunction with other water-dependent uses; watercraft
construction, repair, and maintenance; moorage and launching facilities;
aquaculture; log booming; and public fishing piers and parks.

(2)
"Water-oriented use" means a use which historically has been
dependent on a waterfront location, but with existing technology could be
located away from the waterfront. Examples include, but are not limited to,
wood products manufacturing, watercraft sales, fish processing, petroleum
refining, sand and gravel processing, log storage, and house boats. For the
purposes of determining rent under this chapter, water-oriented uses shall be
classified as water-dependent uses if the activity either is conducted on
state-owned aquatic lands leased on October 1, 1984, or was actually conducted
on the state-owned aquatic lands for at least three years before October 1,
1984. If, after October 1, 1984, the activity is changed to a use other than a
water-dependent use, the activity shall be classified as a nonwater-dependent
use. If continuation of the existing use requires leasing additional
state-owned aquatic lands and is permitted under the shoreline management act
of 1971, chapter 90.58 RCW, the department may allow reasonable expansion of
the water-oriented use.

(3)
"Nonwater-dependent use" means a use which can operate in a location
other than on the waterfront. Examples include, but are not limited to,
hotels, condominiums, apartments, restaurants, retail stores, and warehouses
not part of a marine terminal or transfer facility.

(4) "Log
storage" means the water storage of logs in rafts or otherwise prepared
for shipment in water-borne commerce, but does not include the temporary
holding of logs to be taken directly into a vessel or processing facility.

(5) "Log
booming" means placing logs into and taking them out of the water,
assembling and disassembling log rafts before or after their movement in
water-borne commerce, related handling and sorting activities taking place in
the water, and the temporary holding of logs to be taken directly into a
processing facility. "Log booming" does not include the temporary
holding of logs to be taken directly into a vessel.

(6)
"Department" means the department of natural resources.

(7) "Port
district" means a port district created under Title 53 RCW.

(8) The "real rate
of return" means the average for the most recent ten calendar years of the
average rate of return on conventional real property mortgages as reported by
the federal home loan bank board or any successor agency, minus the average inflation
rate for the most recent ten calendar years.

(9) The "inflation
rate" for a given year is the percentage rate of change in the previous
calendar year's all commodity producer price index of the bureau of labor
statistics of the United States department of commerce. If the index ceases to
be published, the department shall designate by rule a comparable substitute
index.

(10) "Public
utility lines" means pipes, conduits, and similar facilities for
distribution of water, electricity, natural gas, telephone, other electronic
communication, and sewers, including sewer outfall lines.

(11)
"Terminal" means a point of interchange between land and water
carriers, such as a pier, wharf, or group of such, equipped with facilities for
care and handling of cargo and/or passengers.

(12) "State-owned
aquatic lands" means those aquatic lands and waterways administered by the
department of natural resources or managed under RCW 79.90.475 by a port
district. "State-owned aquatic lands" does not include aquatic lands
owned in fee by, or withdrawn for the use of, state agencies other than the
department of natural resources.

(13)
"City" means a city or town created under Title 35 or 35A RCW.

(14)
"Marina" means a waterfront facility that provides moorage for recreational
vessels, charter vessels, commercial fishing vessels, and water-based
aircraft. A marina facility may include fuel docks and associated chandlery
activities designed to serve recreational vessels, charter vessels, commercial
fishing vessels, and water-based aircraft.

(15) "Harbor
management plan" means a plan adopted by the governing body of a city and
providing, at a minimum, for the protection and maintenance of maritime
navigation, safe and friendly mooring and anchoring for resident and transient
vessels, the maintenance and improvement of water quality and aquatic
resources, the development and improvement of maritime facilities for resident
and transient users, the preservation of natural resources and protection of
fish and wildlife, the support of maritime commerce, the preservation and
enhancement of public access to harbors, the enforcement of applicable laws,
and the enhancement of public health, safety, and welfare.

Sec. 2. RCW 79.90.475 and 1984 c
221 s 6 are each amended to read as follows:

Upon request of a port
district, the department and port district may enter into an agreement
authorizing the port district to manage state-owned aquatic lands ((abutting
or used in conjunction with and contiguous to uplands owned, leased, or
otherwise managed by a port district,)) for port purposes as provided in
Title 53 RCW. The lands that may be included in a port district aquatic
lands management agreement are those state-owned aquatic lands abutting or used
in conjunction with and contiguous to uplands owned, leased, or otherwise
managed by a port district. All state-owned aquatic lands beneath public
marina facilities developed or maintained by a port district are eligible for
management by the port district under a management agreement.

((Such)) A
port district aquatic lands management agreement shall include, but not be
limited to, provisions defining the specific area to be managed, the term,
conditions of occupancy, reservations, periodic review, and other conditions to
ensure consistency with the state Constitution and the policies of this
chapter. If a port district acquires operating management, lease, or ownership
of real property which abuts state-owned aquatic lands currently under lease
from the state to a person other than the port district, the port district
shall manage such aquatic lands if: (1) The port district acquires the
leasehold interest in accordance with state law, or (2) the current lessee and
the department agree to termination of the current lease to accommodate
management by the port. The administration of aquatic lands covered by a port
district aquatic lands management agreement shall be consistent with the
aquatic land policies of chapters 79.90 through 79.96 RCW and the implementing
((regulations)) rules adopted by the department. The
administrative procedures for management of the lands shall be those of Title
53 RCW.

No rent shall be due
the state for the use of state-owned aquatic lands managed under this section
for water-dependent or water-oriented uses. If a port district manages
state-owned aquatic lands under this section and either leases or otherwise
permits any person to use such lands, the rental fee attributable to such
aquatic land only shall be comparable to the rent charged lessees for the same
or similar uses by the department: PROVIDED, That a port district need not
itemize for the lessee any charges for state-owned aquatic lands improved by
the port district for use by carriers by water. If a port leases state-owned
aquatic lands to any person for nonwater-dependent use, eighty-five percent of
the revenue attributable to the rent of the state-owned aquatic land only shall
be paid to the state.

Upon application for a
management agreement, and so long as the application is pending and being
diligently pursued, no rent shall be due the department for the lease by the
port district of state-owned aquatic lands included within the application for
water-dependent or water-oriented uses.

The department and
representatives of the port industry shall develop a proposed model management
agreement which shall be used as the basis for negotiating the management
agreements required by this section. The model management agreement shall be
reviewed and approved by the board of natural resources.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
3. A new section is added
to chapter 79.90 RCW to read as follows:

(1) Upon request of a
city, the department and city may enter into an agreement authorizing the city
to manage state-owned aquatic lands for the purpose of operating a publicly
owned marina. The lands that may be included in a city aquatic lands
management agreement are those state-owned aquatic lands abutting or used in
conjunction with and contiguous to uplands owned, leased, or otherwise managed
by a city. All state-owned aquatic lands beneath any publicly owned marina
developed or maintained by a city are eligible for management by the city under
a management agreement.

A city aquatic lands
management agreement shall include, but not be limited to, provisions defining
the specific area to be managed, the term, conditions of occupancy,
reservations, periodic review, and other conditions to ensure consistency with
the state Constitution and the policies of this chapter. If a city acquires
operating management, lease, or ownership of real property that abuts
state-owned aquatic lands currently under lease from the state to a person
other than the city, the city shall manage the aquatic lands if: (a) The city
acquires the leasehold interest in accordance with state law, or (b) the
current lessee and the department agree to termination of the current lease to
accommodate management by the city. The administration of aquatic lands
covered by a city aquatic lands management agreement shall be consistent with
the aquatic land policies of chapters 79.90 through 79.96 RCW and the
implementing rules adopted by the department. The administrative procedures for
management of the lands shall be those of Title 35 or 35A RCW, whichever is
appropriate.

No rent is due the
state for the use of state-owned aquatic lands managed under this section for
water-dependent or water-oriented uses. If a city manages state-owned aquatic
lands under this section and either leases or otherwise permits any person to
use the lands, the rental fee attributable to the aquatic land only shall be
comparable to the rent charged lessees for the same or similar uses by the
department. If a city leases state-owned aquatic lands to any person for
nonwater-dependent use, eighty-five percent of the revenue attributable to the
rent of the state-owned aquatic land only shall be paid to the state.

Upon application for a
management agreement, and so long as the application is pending and being
diligently pursued, no rent is due the department for the lease by the city of
state-owned aquatic lands included within the application for water-dependent
or water-oriented uses.

The department and
representatives of the association of Washington cities shall develop a
proposed model management agreement that shall be used as the basis for
negotiating the management agreements required by this section. The model
management agreement shall be reviewed and approved by the board of natural
resources.

(2) A city that
operates a publicly owned marina within the territorial limits of a port
district shall obtain the approval of the port commission prior to applying to
the department for a management agreement. A city with marina facilities in
existence on the effective date of this act may enter into a management
agreement for those facilities without port commission approval.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
4. A new section is added
to chapter 79.90 RCW to read as follows:

(1) Upon request of a
city, the department and city may enter into an agreement authorizing the city
to manage all or part of state-owned aquatic lands within its jurisdiction for
the purpose of implementing a harbor management plan.

A city aquatic lands
management agreement shall include, but not be limited to, provisions defining
the specific area to be managed, the term, conditions of occupancy,
reservations, periodic review, and other conditions to ensure consistency with
the state Constitution and the policies of this chapter. A city shall manage
state-owned aquatic lands currently under lease from the state to a person
other than the city if: (a) The city acquires the leasehold interest in
accordance with state law, or (b) the current lessee and the department agree
to termination of the current lease to accommodate management by the city. The
city shall assume management of aquatic lands otherwise within the area to be
managed upon expiration of existing leases to any person other than the city.
The administration of aquatic lands covered by a city aquatic lands management
agreement shall be consistent with the aquatic land policies of chapters 79.90
through 79.96 RCW and the implementing rules adopted by the department. The
administrative procedures for management of the lands shall be those of Title
35 or 35A RCW, whichever is appropriate.

No rent is due the
state for the use of state-owned aquatic lands managed under this section for
water-dependent or water-oriented uses. If a city manages state-owned aquatic
lands under this section and either leases or otherwise permits any person to
use the lands, the rental fee attributable to the aquatic land only shall be
comparable to the rent charged lessees for the same or similar uses by the
department. If a city leases state-owned aquatic lands to any person for
nonwater-dependent use, eighty-five percent of the revenue attributable to the
rent of the state-owned aquatic land only shall be paid to the state.

Upon application for a
management agreement, and so long as the application is pending and being
diligently pursued, no rent is due the department for the lease by the city of
state-owned aquatic lands included within the application for water-dependent
or water-oriented uses.

The department and
representatives of the association of Washington cities shall develop a
proposed model management agreement that shall be used as the basis for
negotiating the management agreements required by this section. The model management
agreement shall be reviewed and approved by the board of natural resources.

(2) A city that
implements a harbor management plan within the territorial limits of a port
district shall obtain the approval of the port commission prior to applying to the
department for a management agreement. A city with a harbor management plan
adopted before the effective date of this act may enter into a management
agreement for those facilities without port commission approval.

Sec. 5. RCW 79.90.520 and 1991 c
64 s 1 are each amended to read as follows:

The manager shall, by
rule, provide for an administrative review of any aquatic land rent proposed to
be charged. The rules shall require that the lessee or applicant for release
file a request for review within thirty days after the manager has notified the
lessee or applicant of the rent due. For leases issued by the department, the
final authority for the review rests with the board of natural resources. For
leases managed under RCW 79.90.475, the final authority for the review rests
with the appropriate port commission. For leases managed under section 3 or
4 of this act, the final authority for the review rests with the appropriate
city legislative authority. If the request for review is made within
thirty days after the manager's final determination as to the rental, the
lessee may pay rent at the preceding year's rate pending completion of the
review, and shall pay any additional rent or be entitled to a refund, with
interest thirty days after announcement of the decision. The interest rate
shall be fixed, from time to time, by rule adopted by the board of natural
resources and shall not be less than six percent per annum. Nothing in this
section abrogates the right of an aggrieved party to pursue legal remedies.
For purposes of this section, "manager" is the department except
where state-owned aquatic lands are managed by a port district or a city,
in which case "manager" is the appropriate port district or
city.

Sec. 6. RCW 79.93.040 and 1984 c
221 s 21 are each amended to read as follows:

If the United States
government has established pierhead lines within a waterway created under the
laws of this state at any distance from the boundaries established by the
state, structures may be constructed in that strip of waterway between the
waterway boundary and the nearest pierhead line only with the consent of the
department of natural resources and upon such plans, terms, and conditions and
for such term as determined by the department. However, no permit shall extend
for a period longer than thirty years.

The department may
cancel any permit upon sixty days' notice for a substantial breach by the
permittee of any of the permit conditions.

If a waterway is within
the territorial limits of a port district, the duties assigned by this section
to the department may be exercised by the port commission of such port district
as provided in RCW 79.90.475. If a waterway is within the territorial limits
of a city, the duties assigned by this section to the department may be
exercised by the city as provided in section 3 or 4 of this act.

Nothing in
this section shall confer upon, create, or recognize in any abutting owner any
right or privilege in or to any strip of waterway abutting any street and
between prolongations of the lines of such street, but the control of and the
right to use such strip is hereby reserved to the state of Washington, except
as authorized by RCW 79.90.475 and section 3 or 4 of this act.

---
END ---