BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF
WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec.
1. It is the intent of the
legislature to: Promote the public's interest in fostering the orderly and
responsible distribution of malt beverages and wine towards effective control
of consumption; recognize the principles of a fair and efficient private sector
threeBtier system
of distribution of such beverages; and establish a pricing procedure of wine
and malt beverage products sold at retail by the liquor control board that will
diminish the board's unfair competitive advantage over the state-mandated
private sector three-tier system of distribution and pricing of wine and malt
beverages.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
2. A new section is added
to chapter 66.16 RCW to read as follows:

(1) The liquor control
board must use the following calculation to establish monthly retail sale
prices of beer and wine products sold in liquor control board stores and agency
stores: The average wholesale product price posted for the private sector
filed under RCW 66.28.180, plus a statewide average retail price markup of
twenty-five percent for both malt beverages and wine.

(2) Individual product
retail price markups may vary to attain the statewide average markup required
by this section. The total revenue resulting from the retail markup must
represent a twenty-five percent average markup for malt beverages or wine.

(3) When the board
cannot identify a posted price for an identical wine or malt beverage, the
board shall use a comparable product for the purpose of establishing the base
wholesale price.

(4)
Nothing in this section affects the retail purchase discounts of licensees
under RCW 66.24.440.

---
END ---