BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF
WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec.
1. A new section is added
to chapter 43.41 RCW to read as follows:

(1) The director of
financial management shall devise a modern and complete system for achieving
accountability for the use of public funds in all contracts made by any state
agency. The director shall consult with stakeholder groups when devising the
system.

(2) The system shall
address, but not be limited to, contractor selection; contract provisions,
including performance measures that may be required under RCW 43.88.090;
contract management; contract monitoring; auditing and postevaluation; timely
resolution of monitoring and audit findings and recommendations; and financial
accountability expectations. The financial accountability expectations shall
include, but not be limited to, cost allocation principles, allowability of
costs, terms of reimbursement, compliance requirements, and timely recovery of
overpayments and unallowable program costs. The system shall also take into
account the need to coordinate the activities of multiple funding sources to
preclude duplication of effort and funding.

(3) The system shall
apply to contracts of any sort that a state agency awards, including, but not
limited to, contracts awarded for any public work, maintenance, or other work
or for the purchase of materials, supplies, equipment, or any type of service
including personal services and client services as defined in chapter 39.29
RCW.

(4) The director shall
update the system on a yearly basis. When updating the system, the director
shall examine proven and effective systems for achieving contract
accountability nationwide and adopt such systems or parts thereof to meet the
needs of the state.

(5) The director shall
also provide resource materials and training for state officials and contract
officers and contractors on the system.

(6) All branches of
state government, or any division thereof, must implement the system.

(7) In order to support
state agencies with consolidated, readily available information on contracts
and the historical performance of contractors, the director shall establish and
maintain a data base containing information regarding contractors and
subcontractors who have done business with the state government. The data base
must contain a list of businesses that have been debarred under subsection (8)
of this section.

(8)(a) As part of the
system required by subsection (1) of this section, the director shall establish
standards and procedures under which contractors or subcontractors may be
debarred from contracting with the state government for two years.

(b) The standards must
clearly specify the conduct that may subject a contractor or subcontractor to
debarment.

(c) The procedures must
provide for a hearing before debarment, which must be held under chapter 34.05
RCW.

(9) The state auditor
shall perform performance verifications and performance audits of state
government to evaluate the implementation of the system required by subsection
(1) of this section. For purposes of this subsection:

(a) "Performance
verification" has the same meaning as in RCW 43.88.020; and

(b) "Performance
audit" has the same meaning as in RCW 44.28.005.

(10) For purposes of
this section, "state government" includes the executive, legislative,
and judicial branches.

Sec. 2. RCW 28B.10.029 and 1998
c 344 s 5 and 1998 c 111 s 2 are each reenacted and amended to read as follows:

(1) An institution of
higher education may exercise independently those powers otherwise granted to
the director of general administration in chapter 43.19 RCW in connection with
the purchase and disposition of all material, supplies, services, and equipment
needed for the support, maintenance, and use of the respective institution of
higher education. Property disposition policies followed by institutions of
higher education shall be consistent with policies followed by the department
of general administration. Purchasing policies and procedures followed by
institutions of higher education shall be in compliance with chapters 39.19,
39.29, and 43.03 RCW, and RCW 43.19.1901, 43.19.1906, 43.19.1911, 43.19.1917,
43.19.1937, 43.19.534, 43.19.685, 43.19.700 through 43.19.704, and 43.19.560
through 43.19.637. The community and technical colleges shall comply with RCW
43.19.450. Except for the University of Washington, institutions of higher
education shall comply with RCW 43.19.1935, 43.19.19363, and 43.19.19368. If
an institution of higher education can satisfactorily demonstrate to the
director of the office of financial management that the cost of compliance is
greater than the value of benefits from any of the following statutes, then it
shall be exempt from them: RCW 43.19.685; 43.19.534; and 43.19.637. Any
institution of higher education that chooses to exercise independent purchasing
authority for a commodity or group of commodities shall notify the director of
general administration. Thereafter the director of general administration
shall not be required to provide those services for that institution for the
duration of the general administration contract term for that commodity or
group of commodities.

(2) An institution of
higher education may exercise independently those powers otherwise granted to
the public printer in chapter 43.78 RCW in connection with the production or
purchase of any printing and binding needed by the respective institution of
higher education. Purchasing policies and procedures followed by institutions
of higher education shall be in compliance with chapter 39.19 RCW. Any
institution of higher education that chooses to exercise independent printing
production or purchasing authority shall notify the public printer. Thereafter
the public printer shall not be required to provide those services for that
institution.

(3) Contracts
awarded under this section are subject to the modern and complete system for
achieving accountability developed by the office of financial management under
section 1 of this act.

Sec. 3. RCW 28B.10.350 and 2000
c 138 s 202 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) When the cost to
The Evergreen State College, any regional university, or state university, of
any building, construction, renovation, remodeling, or demolition other than
maintenance or repairs will equal or exceed the sum of twenty-five thousand
dollars, complete plans and specifications for such work shall be prepared and
such work shall be put out for public bids and the contract shall be awarded to
the lowest responsible bidder if in accordance with the bid specifications:
PROVIDED, That when the estimated cost of such building, construction,
renovation, remodeling, or demolition equals or exceeds the sum of twenty-five
thousand dollars, such project shall be deemed a public works and "the
prevailing rate of wage," under chapter 39.12 RCW shall be applicable
thereto: PROVIDED FURTHER, That when such building, construction, renovation,
remodeling, or demolition involves one trade or craft area and the estimated
cost exceeds ten thousand dollars, complete plans and specifications for such
work shall be prepared and such work shall be put out for public bids, and the
contract shall be awarded to the lowest responsible bidder if in accordance
with the bid specifications. This subsection shall not apply when a contract
is awarded by the small works roster procedure authorized in RCW 39.04.155 or
under any other procedure authorized for an institution of higher education.

(2) The Evergreen State
College, any regional university, or state university may require a project to
be put to public bid even when it is not required to do so under subsection (1)
of this section.

(3) Where the estimated
cost to The Evergreen State College, any regional university, or state
university of any building, construction, renovation, remodeling, or demolition
is less than twenty-five thousand dollars or the contract is awarded by the
small works roster procedure authorized in RCW 39.04.155, the publication
requirements of RCW 39.04.020 shall be inapplicable.

(4) In the event of any
emergency when the public interest or property of The Evergreen State College,
regional university, or state university would suffer material injury or damage
by delay, the president of such college or university may declare the existence
of such an emergency and reciting the facts constituting the same may waive the
requirements of this section with reference to any contract in order to correct
the condition causing the emergency: PROVIDED, That an "emergency,"
for the purposes of this section, means a condition likely to result in
immediate physical injury to persons or to property of such college or
university in the absence of prompt remedial action or a condition which
immediately impairs the institution's ability to perform its educational
obligations.

(5) Contracts
awarded under this section are subject to the modern and complete system for
achieving accountability developed by the office of financial management under
section 1 of this act.

Sec. 4. RCW 28B.50.330 and 1993
c 379 s 108 are each amended to read as follows:

The boards of trustees
of college districts are empowered in accordance with the provisions of this
chapter to provide for the construction, reconstruction, erection, equipping,
demolition, and major alterations of buildings and other capital assets, and
the acquisition of sites, rights-of-way, easements, improvements, or
appurtenances for the use of the aforementioned colleges as authorized by the
college board in accordance with RCW 28B.50.140; to be financed by bonds
payable out of special funds from revenues hereafter derived from income
received from such facilities, gifts, bequests, or grants, and such additional
funds as the legislature may provide, and payable out of a bond retirement fund
to be established by the respective district boards in accordance with rules
and regulations of the state board. With respect to building, improvements, or
repairs, or other work, where the estimated cost exceeds twenty-five thousand
dollars, complete plans and specifications for such work shall be prepared and
such work shall be put out for public bids and the contract shall be awarded to
the lowest responsible bidder if in accordance with the bid specifications:
PROVIDED, That when such building, construction, renovation, remodeling, or
demolition involves one trade or craft area and the estimated cost exceeds ten
thousand dollars, complete plans and specifications for such work shall be
prepared and such work shall be put out for public bids, and the contract shall
be awarded to the lowest responsible bidder if in accordance with the bid
specifications. This subsection shall not apply when a contract is awarded by
the small works procedure authorized in RCW ((39.04.150)) 39.04.155:
PROVIDED FURTHER, That any project regardless of dollar amount may be put to public
bid.

Where the estimated
cost to any college of any building, improvements, or repairs, or other work,
is less than twenty-five thousand dollars, the publication requirements of RCW
39.04.020 shall be inapplicable.

Contracts awarded
under this section are subject to the modern and complete system for achieving
accountability developed by the office of financial management under section 1
of this act.

Sec. 5. RCW 39.04.155 and 2000 c
138 s 101 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) This section
provides uniform small works roster provisions to award contracts for
construction, building, renovation, remodeling, alteration, repair, or
improvement of real property that may be used by state agencies and by any
local government that is expressly authorized to use these provisions. These
provisions may be used in lieu of other procedures to award contracts for such
work with an estimated cost of two hundred thousand dollars or less.

(2) A state agency or
authorized local government may create a single general small works roster, or
may create a small works roster for different specialties or categories of
anticipated work. Where applicable, small works rosters may make distinctions
between contractors based upon different geographic areas served by the
contractor. The small works roster or rosters shall consist of all responsible
contractors who have requested to be on the list, and where required by law are
properly licensed or registered to perform such work in this state. A state
agency or local government establishing a small works roster or rosters may
require eligible contractors desiring to be placed on a roster or rosters to
keep current records of any applicable licenses, certifications, registrations,
bonding, insurance, or other appropriate matters on file with the state agency
or local government as a condition of being placed on a roster or rosters. At
least once a year, the state agency or local government shall publish in a
newspaper of general circulation within the jurisdiction a notice of the
existence of the roster or rosters and solicit the names of contractors for
such roster or rosters. In addition, responsible contractors shall be added to
an appropriate roster or rosters at any time they submit a written request and
necessary records. Master contracts may be required to be signed that become
effective when a specific award is made using a small works roster.

(3) A state agency
establishing a small works roster or rosters shall adopt rules implementing
this section. A local government establishing a small works roster or rosters
shall adopt an ordinance or resolution implementing this section. Procedures
included in rules adopted by the department of general administration in
implementing this section must be included in any rules providing for a small
works roster or rosters that is adopted by another state agency, if the
authority for that state agency to engage in these activities has been
delegated to it by the department of general administration under chapter 43.19
RCW. An interlocal contract or agreement between two or more state agencies or
local governments establishing a small works roster or rosters to be used by
the parties to the agreement or contract must clearly identify the lead entity
that is responsible for implementing the provisions of this section.

(4) Procedures shall be
established for securing telephone, written, or electronic quotations from
contractors on the appropriate small works roster to assure that a competitive
price is established and to award contracts to the lowest responsible bidder,
as defined in RCW 43.19.1911. Invitations for quotations shall include an
estimate of the scope and nature of the work to be performed as well as
materials and equipment to be furnished. However, detailed plans and
specifications need not be included in the invitation. This section does not
eliminate other requirements for architectural or engineering approvals as to quality
and compliance with building codes. Quotations may be invited from all
appropriate contractors on the appropriate small works roster. As an
alternative, quotations may be invited from at least five contractors on the
appropriate small works roster who have indicated the capability of performing
the kind of work being contracted, in a manner that will equitably distribute
the opportunity among the contractors on the appropriate roster. However, if
the estimated cost of the work is from one hundred thousand dollars to two
hundred thousand dollars, a state agency or local government, other than a port
district, that chooses to solicit bids from less than all the appropriate
contractors on the appropriate small works roster must also notify the remaining
contractors on the appropriate small works roster that quotations on the work
are being sought. The government has the sole option of determining whether
this notice to the remaining contractors is made by: (a) Publishing notice in
a legal newspaper in general circulation in the area where the work is to be
done; (b) mailing a notice to these contractors; or (c) sending a notice to
these contractors by facsimile or other electronic means. For purposes of this
subsection, "equitably distribute" means that a state agency or local
government soliciting bids may not favor certain contractors on the appropriate
small works roster over other contractors on the appropriate small works roster
who perform similar services.

(5) A contract awarded
from a small works roster under this section need not be advertised.

(6) Immediately after
an award is made, the bid quotations obtained shall be recorded, open to public
inspection, and available by telephone inquiry.

(7) The breaking of any
project into units or accomplishing any projects by phases is prohibited if it
is done for the purpose of avoiding the maximum dollar amount of a contract
that may be let using the small works roster process.

(8) As used in this
section, "state agency" means the department of general
administration, the state parks and recreation commission, the department of
natural resources, the department of fish and wildlife, the department of
transportation, any institution of higher education as defined under RCW
28B.10.016, and any other state agency delegated authority by the department of
general administration to engage in construction, building, renovation,
remodeling, alteration, improvement, or repair activities.

(9) Contracts
awarded under this section are subject to the modern and complete system for
achieving accountability developed by the office of financial management under
section 1 of this act.

Sec. 6. RCW 39.80.050 and 1981 c
61 s 5 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) The agency shall
negotiate a contract with the most qualified firm for architectural and
engineering services at a price which the agency determines is fair and
reasonable to the agency. In making its determination, the agency shall take
into account the estimated value of the services to be rendered as well as the
scope, complexity, and professional nature thereof.

(2) If the agency is
unable to negotiate a satisfactory contract with the firm selected at a price
the agency determines to be fair and reasonable, negotiations with that firm
shall be formally terminated and the agency shall select other firms in
accordance with RCW 39.80.040 and continue in accordance with this section
until an agreement is reached or the process is terminated.

(3) Contracts
awarded under this section are subject to the modern and complete system for
achieving accountability developed by the office of financial management under
section 1 of this act.

Sec. 7. RCW 43.19.1906 and 1999
sp.s. c 1 s 606, 1999 c 195 s 1, and 1999 c 106 s 1 are each reenacted and
amended to read as follows:

Insofar as practicable,
all purchases and sales shall be based on competitive bids, and a formal sealed
bid procedure shall be used as standard procedure for all purchases and
contracts for purchases and sales executed by the state purchasing and material
control director and under the powers granted by RCW 43.19.190 through
43.19.1939. Contracts awarded under this section are subject to the modern
and complete system for achieving accountability developed by the office of
financial management under section 1 of this act. This requirement also
applies to purchases and contracts for purchases and sales executed by
agencies, including educational institutions, under delegated authority granted
in accordance with provisions of RCW 43.19.190 or under RCW 28B.10.029.
However, formal sealed bidding is not necessary for:

(1) Emergency purchases
made pursuant to RCW 43.19.200 if the sealed bidding procedure would prevent or
hinder the emergency from being met appropriately;

(2) Purchases not
exceeding thirty-five thousand dollars, or subsequent limits as calculated by
the office of financial management: PROVIDED, That the state director of
general administration shall establish procedures to assure that purchases made
by or on behalf of the various state agencies shall not be made so as to avoid
the thirty-five thousand dollar bid limitation, or subsequent bid limitations
as calculated by the office of financial management: PROVIDED FURTHER, That
the state purchasing and material control director is authorized to reduce the
formal sealed bid limits of thirty-five thousand dollars, or subsequent limits
as calculated by the office of financial management, to a lower dollar amount
for purchases by individual state agencies if considered necessary to maintain
full disclosure of competitive procurement or otherwise to achieve overall
state efficiency and economy in purchasing and material control. Quotations
from three thousand dollars to thirty-five thousand dollars, or subsequent
limits as calculated by the office of financial management, shall be secured
from at least three vendors to assure establishment of a competitive price and
may be obtained by telephone or written quotations, or both. The agency shall
invite at least one quotation each from a certified minority and a certified
women-owned vendor who shall otherwise qualify to perform such work.
Immediately after the award is made, the bid quotations obtained shall be
recorded and open to public inspection and shall be available by telephone
inquiry. A record of competition for all such purchases from three thousand
dollars to thirty-five thousand dollars, or subsequent limits as calculated by
the office of financial management, shall be documented for audit purposes.
Purchases up to three thousand dollars may be made without competitive bids
based on buyer experience and knowledge of the market in achieving maximum
quality at minimum cost;

(3) Purchases which are
clearly and legitimately limited to a single source of supply and purchases
involving special facilities, services, or market conditions, in which
instances the purchase price may be best established by direct negotiation;

(4) Purchases of
insurance and bonds by the risk management office under RCW 43.19.1935;

(5) Purchases and
contracts for vocational rehabilitation clients of the department of social and
health services: PROVIDED, That this exemption is effective only when the
state purchasing and material control director, after consultation with the
director of the division of vocational rehabilitation and appropriate
department of social and health services procurement personnel, declares that
such purchases may be best executed through direct negotiation with one or more
suppliers in order to expeditiously meet the special needs of the state's
vocational rehabilitation clients;

(6) Purchases by
universities for hospital operation or biomedical teaching or research purposes
and by the state purchasing and material control director, as the agent for
state hospitals as defined in RCW 72.23.010, and for health care programs
provided in state correctional institutions as defined in RCW 72.65.010(3) and
veterans' institutions as defined in RCW 72.36.010 and 72.36.070, made by
participating in contracts for materials, supplies, and equipment entered into
by nonprofit cooperative hospital group purchasing organizations;

(7) Purchases for
resale by institutions of higher education to other than public agencies when
such purchases are for the express purpose of supporting instructional programs
and may best be executed through direct negotiation with one or more suppliers
in order to meet the special needs of the institution;

(8) Purchases by
institutions of higher education not exceeding thirty-five thousand dollars:
PROVIDED, That for purchases between three thousand dollars and thirty-five
thousand dollars quotations shall be secured from at least three vendors to
assure establishment of a competitive price and may be obtained by telephone or
written quotations, or both. For purchases between three thousand dollars and
thirty-five thousand dollars, each institution of higher education shall invite
at least one quotation each from a certified minority and a certified women-owned
vendor who shall otherwise qualify to perform such work. A record of
competition for all such purchases made from three thousand to thirty-five
thousand dollars shall be documented for audit purposes; and

(9) Negotiation of a
contract by the department of transportation, valid until June 30, 2001, with
registered tow truck operators to provide roving service patrols in one or more
Washington state patrol tow zones whereby those registered tow truck operators
wishing to participate would cooperatively, with the department of
transportation, develop a demonstration project upon terms and conditions
negotiated by the parties.

Beginning on July 1,
1995, and on July 1 of each succeeding odd-numbered year, the dollar limits
specified in this section shall be adjusted as follows: The office of
financial management shall calculate such limits by adjusting the previous
biennium's limits by the appropriate federal inflationary index reflecting the
rate of inflation for the previous biennium. Such amounts shall be rounded to
the nearest one hundred dollars. However, the three thousand dollar figure in
subsections (2) and (8) of this section may not be adjusted to exceed five
thousand dollars.

Sec. 8. RCW 43.30.300 and 1987 c
472 s 13 are each amended to read as follows:

The department of
natural resources is authorized:

(1) To construct,
operate, and maintain primitive outdoor recreation and conservation facilities
on lands under its jurisdiction which are of primitive character when deemed
necessary by the department to achieve maximum effective development of such
lands and resources consistent with the purposes for which the lands are held.
This authority shall be exercised only after review by the interagency
committee for outdoor recreation and determination by the committee that the
department is the most appropriate agency to undertake such construction,
operation and maintenance. Such review is not required for campgrounds
designated and prepared or approved by the department.

(2) To acquire right of
way and develop public access to lands under the jurisdiction of the department
of natural resources and suitable for public outdoor recreation and
conservation purposes.

(3) To receive and
expend funds from federal and state outdoor recreation funding measures for the
purposes of RCW 43.30.300 and ((79.08.109)) 79A.50.110.

(4) Contracts
awarded under this section are subject to the modern and complete system for
achieving accountability developed by the office of financial management under
section 1 of this act.

Sec. 9. RCW 43.78.110 and 1993 c
379 s 107 are each amended to read as follows:

Whenever in the
judgment of the public printer certain printing, ruling, binding, or supplies
can be secured from private sources more economically than by doing the work or
preparing the supplies in the state printing plant, the public printer may
obtain such work or supplies from such private sources. Contracts awarded
under this section are subject to the modern and complete system for achieving
accountability developed by the office of financial management under section 1
of this act.

In event any work or
supplies are secured on behalf of the state under this section the state
printing plant shall be entitled to add up to five percent to the cost thereof
to cover the handling of the orders which shall be added to the bills and
charged to the respective authorities ordering the work or supplies. The five
percent handling charge shall not apply to contracts with institutions of
higher education.

Sec. 10. RCW 43.105.041 and 1999
c 285 s 5 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) The board shall
have the following powers and duties related to information services:

(a) To develop
standards governing the acquisition and disposition of equipment, proprietary
software and purchased services, and confidentiality of computerized data;

(b) To purchase, lease,
rent, or otherwise acquire, dispose of, and maintain equipment, proprietary
software, and purchased services, or to delegate to other agencies and
institutions of state government, under appropriate standards, the authority to
purchase, lease, rent, or otherwise acquire, dispose of, and maintain
equipment, proprietary software, and purchased services: PROVIDED, That,
agencies and institutions of state government are expressly prohibited from
acquiring or disposing of equipment, proprietary software, and purchased
services without such delegation of authority. The acquisition and disposition
of equipment, proprietary software, and purchased services is exempt from RCW
43.19.1919 and, as provided in RCW 43.19.1901, from the provisions of RCW
43.19.190 through 43.19.200. Contracts awarded under this section are
subject to the modern and complete system for achieving accountability
developed by the office of financial management under section 1 of this act.
This subsection (1)(b) does not apply to the legislative branch;

(c) To develop
statewide or interagency technical policies, standards, and procedures;

(d) To review and
approve standards and common specifications for new or expanded
telecommunications networks proposed by agencies, public postsecondary
education institutions, educational service districts, or statewide or regional
providers of K-12 information technology services, and to assure the
cost-effective development and incremental implementation of a statewide video
telecommunications system to serve: Public schools; educational service
districts; vocational-technical institutes; community colleges; colleges and
universities; state and local government; and the general public through public
affairs programming;

(e) To provide
direction concerning strategic planning goals and objectives for the state.
The board shall seek input from the legislature and the judiciary;

(f) To develop and
implement a process for the resolution of appeals by:

(i) Vendors concerning
the conduct of an acquisition process by an agency or the department; or

(ii) A customer agency
concerning the provision of services by the department or by other state agency
providers;

(g) To establish
policies for the periodic review by the department of agency performance which
may include but are not limited to analysis of:

(i) Planning,
management, control, and use of information services;

(ii) Training and
education; and

(iii) Project
management;

(h) To set its meeting
schedules and convene at scheduled times, or meet at the request of a majority
of its members, the chair, or the director; and

(i) To review and
approve that portion of the department's budget requests that provides for
support to the board.

(2) Statewide technical
standards to promote and facilitate electronic information sharing and access
are an essential component of acceptable and reliable public access service and
complement content-related standards designed to meet those goals. The board
shall:

(a) Establish technical
standards to facilitate electronic access to government information and
interoperability of information systems. Local governments are strongly
encouraged to follow the standards established by the board; and

(b) Require agencies to
consider electronic public access needs when planning new information systems
or major upgrades of systems.

In developing these
standards, the board is encouraged to include the state library, state
archives, and appropriate representatives of state and local government.

(3)(a) The board, in
consultation with the K-20 board, has the duty to govern, operate, and oversee
the technical design, implementation, and operation of the K-20 network
including, but not limited to, the following duties: Establishment and
implementation of K-20 network technical policy, including technical standards
and conditions of use; review and approval of network design; procurement of
shared network services and equipment; and resolving user/provider disputes
concerning technical matters. The board shall delegate general operational and
technical oversight to the K-20 network technical steering committee as
appropriate.

(b) The
board has the authority to adopt rules under chapter 34.05 RCW to implement the
provisions regarding the technical operations and conditions of use of the K-20
network.

Sec. 11. RCW 47.28.090 and 1985 c
242 s 3 are each amended to read as follows:

At the time and place
named in the call for bids the department of transportation shall publicly open
and read the final figure in each of the bid proposals that have been properly
filed and read only the unit prices of the three lowest bids, and shall award
the contract to the lowest responsible bidder unless the department has, for
good cause, continued the date of opening bids to a day certain, or rejected
that bid. Any bid may be rejected if the bidder has previously defaulted in
the performance of and failed to complete a written public contract, or has
been convicted of a crime arising from a previous public contract. If the
lowest responsible bidder fails to meet the provisions or specifications
requiring compliance with chapter 39.19 RCW and the rules adopted to implement
that chapter, the department may award the contract to the next lowest
responsible bidder which does meet the provisions or specifications or may
reject all bids and readvertise. All bids shall be under sealed cover and
accompanied by deposit in cash, certified check, cashier's check, or surety
bond in an amount equal to five percent of the amount of the bid, and a bid
shall not be considered unless the deposit is enclosed with it.

Contracts awarded
under this section are subject to the modern and complete system for achieving
accountability developed by the office of financial management under section 1
of this act.

Sec. 12. RCW 47.56.030 and 1995
1st sp.s. c 4 s 1 are each amended to read as follows:

The department of
transportation shall have full charge of the construction of all toll bridges
and other toll facilities including the Washington state ferries, and the
operation and maintenance thereof. The transportation commission shall
determine and establish the tolls and charges thereon, and shall perform all
duties and exercise all powers relating to the financing, refinancing, and
fiscal management of all toll bridges and other toll facilities including the
Washington state ferries, and bonded indebtedness in the manner provided by
law. The department shall have full charge of design of all toll facilities.
The department shall proceed with the construction of such toll bridges and
other facilities and the approaches thereto by contract in the manner of state
highway construction immediately upon there being made available funds for such
work and shall prosecute such work to completion as rapidly as practicable.
The department is authorized to negotiate contracts for any amount without bid
in order to make repairs to ferries or ferry terminal facilities or removal of
such facilities whenever continued use of ferries or ferry terminal facilities
constitutes a real or immediate danger to the traveling public or precludes
prudent use of such ferries or facilities.

The department shall
proceed with the procurement of materials, supplies, services, and equipment
needed for the support, maintenance, and use of a ferry, ferry terminal, or
other facility operated by Washington state ferries, in accordance with chapter
43.19 RCW except as follows:

(1) When the secretary
of the department of transportation determines in writing that the use of
invitation for bid is either not practicable or not advantageous to the state
and it may be necessary to make competitive evaluations, including technical or
performance evaluations among acceptable proposals to complete the contract
award, a contract may be entered into by use of a competitive sealed proposals
method, and a formal request for proposals solicitation. Such formal request
for proposals solicitation shall include a functional description of the needs
and requirements of the state and the significant factors.

(2) When purchases are
made through a formal request for proposals solicitation the contract shall be
awarded to the responsible proposer whose competitive sealed proposal is
determined in writing to be the most advantageous to the state taking into
consideration price and other evaluation factors set forth in the request for
proposals. No significant factors may be used in evaluating a proposal that
are not specified in the request for proposals. Factors that may be considered
in evaluating proposals include but are not limited to: Price maintainability;
reliability; commonality; performance levels; life cycle cost if applicable
under this section; cost of transportation or delivery; delivery schedule offered;
installation cost; cost of spare parts; availability of parts and service
offered; and the following:

(a) The ability,
capacity, and skill of the proposer to perform the contract or provide the
service required;

(b) The character,
integrity, reputation, judgment, experience, and efficiency of the proposer;

(c) Whether the
proposer can perform the contract within the time specified;

(d) The quality of
performance of previous contracts or services;

(e) The previous and
existing compliance by the proposer with laws relating to the contract or
services;

(f) Objective,
measurable criteria defined in the request for proposal. These criteria may
include but are not limited to items such as discounts, delivery costs, maintenance
services costs, installation costs, and transportation costs; and

(g) Such other
information as may be secured having a bearing on the decision to award the
contract.

When purchases are made
through a request for proposal process, proposals received shall be evaluated
based on the evaluation factors set forth in the request for proposal. When a
life cycle cost analysis is used, the life cycle cost of a proposal shall be
given at least the same relative importance as the initial price element specified
in the request of proposal documents. The department may reject any and all
proposals received. If the proposals are not rejected, the award shall be made
to the proposer whose proposal is most advantageous to the department,
considering price and the other evaluation factors set forth in the request for
proposal.

(3) The legislative
transportation committee shall review the secretary's use of the request for
proposals solicitation for Washington state ferries projects to determine if
the process established under chapter 4, Laws of 1995 1st sp. sess. is
appropriate. The results of the review, including recommendations for
modification of the request for proposal process, shall be reported to the
house of representatives and senate transportation committees by January 1,
1997.

(4) Contracts
awarded under this section are subject to the modern and complete system for
achieving accountability developed by the office of financial management under
section 1 of this act.

Sec. 13. RCW 77.12.210 and 2000 c
107 s 218 are each amended to read as follows:

The director shall
maintain and manage real or personal property owned, leased, or held by the
department and shall control the construction of buildings, structures, and improvements
in or on the property, and the contracts awarded under this section are
subject to the modern and complete system for achieving accountability
developed by the office of financial management under section 1 of this act.
The director may adopt rules for the operation and maintenance of the property.

The commission may
authorize the director to sell, lease, convey, or grant concessions upon real
or personal property under the control of the department. This includes the
authority to sell timber, gravel, sand, and other materials or products from
real property held by the department, and to sell or lease the department's
real or personal property or grant concessions or rights of way for roads or
utilities in the property. Oil and gas resources owned by the state which lie
below lands owned, leased, or held by the department shall be offered for lease
by the commissioner of public lands pursuant to chapter 79.14 RCW with the
proceeds being deposited in the state wildlife fund: PROVIDED, That the
commissioner of public lands shall condition such leases at the request of the
department to protect wildlife and its habitat.

If the commission
determines that real or personal property held by the department cannot be used
advantageously by the department, the director may dispose of that property if
it is in the public interest.

If the state acquired
real property with use limited to specific purposes, the director may negotiate
terms for the return of the property to the donor or grantor. Other real
property shall be sold to the highest bidder at public auction. After
appraisal, notice of the auction shall be published at least once a week for
two successive weeks in a newspaper of general circulation within the county
where the property is located at least twenty days prior to sale.

Proceeds from the sales
shall be deposited in the state wildlife fund.

Sec. 14. RCW 79A.05.030 and 1999
c 249 s 302, 1999 c 155 s 1, and 1999 c 59 s 1 are each reenacted and amended
to read as follows:

The commission shall:

(1) Have the care,
charge, control, and supervision of all parks and parkways acquired or set
aside by the state for park or parkway purposes.

(2) Adopt policies, and
adopt, issue, and enforce rules pertaining to the use, care, and administration
of state parks and parkways. The commission shall cause a copy of the rules to
be kept posted in a conspicuous place in every state park to which they are
applicable, but failure to post or keep any rule posted shall be no defense to
any prosecution for the violation thereof.

(3) Permit the use of
state parks and parkways by the public under such rules as shall be adopted.

(4) Clear, drain,
grade, seed, and otherwise improve or beautify parks and parkways, and erect
structures, buildings, fireplaces, and comfort stations and build and maintain
paths, trails, and roadways through or on parks and parkways. Any contracts
awarded for this work are subject to the modern and complete system for
achieving accountability developed by the office of financial management under
section 1 of this act.

(5) Grant concessions
or leases in state parks and parkways, upon such rentals, fees, or percentage
of income or profits and for such terms, in no event longer than fifty years,
and upon such conditions as shall be approved by the commission: PROVIDED,
That leases exceeding a twenty-year term shall require a unanimous vote of the
commission: PROVIDED FURTHER, That if, during the term of any concession or
lease, it is the opinion of the commission that it would be in the best
interest of the state, the commission may, with the consent of the
concessionaire or lessee, alter and amend the terms and conditions of such
concession or lease: PROVIDED FURTHER, That television station leases shall be
subject to the provisions of RCW 79A.05.085, only: PROVIDED FURTHER, That the
rates of such concessions or leases shall be renegotiated at five-year
intervals. No concession shall be granted which will prevent the public from
having free access to the scenic attractions of any park or parkway.

(6) Employ such
assistance as it deems necessary. Commission expenses relating to its use of
volunteer assistance shall be limited to premiums or assessments for the
insurance of volunteers by the department of labor and industries, compensation
of staff who assist volunteers, materials and equipment used in authorized
volunteer projects, training, reimbursement of volunteer travel as provided in
RCW 43.03.050 and 43.03.060, and other reasonable expenses relating to
volunteer recognition. The commission, at its discretion, may waive commission
fees otherwise applicable to volunteers. The commission shall not use
volunteers to replace or supplant classified positions. The use of volunteers
may not lead to the elimination of any employees or permanent positions in the
bargaining unit.

(7) By majority vote of
its authorized membership select and purchase or obtain options upon, lease, or
otherwise acquire for and in the name of the state such tracts of land,
including shore and tide lands, for park and parkway purposes as it deems proper.
If the commission cannot acquire any tract at a price it deems reasonable, it
may, by majority vote of its authorized membership, obtain title thereto, or
any part thereof, by condemnation proceedings conducted by the attorney general
as provided for the condemnation of rights of way for state highways. Option
agreements executed under authority of this subsection shall be valid only if:

(a) The cost of the
option agreement does not exceed one dollar; and

(b) Moneys used for the
purchase of the option agreement are from (i) funds appropriated therefor, or
(ii) funds appropriated for undesignated land acquisitions, or (iii) funds
deemed by the commission to be in excess of the amount necessary for the
purposes for which they were appropriated; and

(c) The maximum amount
payable for the property upon exercise of the option does not exceed the
appraised value of the property.

(8)
Cooperate with the United States, or any county or city of this state, in any
matter pertaining to the acquisition, development, redevelopment, renovation,
care, control, or supervision of any park or parkway, and enter into contracts
in writing to that end. All parks or parkways, to which the state contributed
or in whose care, control, or supervision the state participated pursuant to
the provisions of this section, shall be governed by the provisions hereof.

---
END ---