BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF
WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec.
1. The purpose of this act is
to establish procedures for the orderly formation of new counties and to
provide for an equitable apportionment of the debts, liabilities, and assets of
the parent county or counties between the new county and the remaining portions
or portions of each parent county.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
2. Unless the context
clearly requires otherwise, the definitions in this section apply throughout
this chapter.

(1) "Assets"
means all: (a) Real estate and leasehold interests in real estate owned by the
parent county; (b) tangible personal property owned or leased by the parent
county; and (c) intangible personal property owned by the parent county
including cash, securities, commercial paper, notes, accounts receivable, and
contract rights. Assets are determined as of the first day of the interim
period.

(2) "Interim
period" means the period during which a new county government is
established, the apportionment of debts, liabilities, and assets is
implemented, and the transfer of all records from the parent county or counties
to the new county is completed. The period begins on January 1st after the end
of the regular session at which the new county is created by special
legislation or the year in which an election for the formation of a new county
is approved, and the period ends on December 31st of the same year.

(3) "New
county" means the county that is created by striking territory from a
parent county or counties under Article XI, section 3 of the state
Constitution.

(4) "Parent county
or counties" means the existing county or counties out of which territory
is stricken to create a new county under Article XI, section 3 of the state
Constitution.

(5)
"Proponents" means up to five individuals who are registered voters
in the proposed new county who initiate the petition process to create a new
county under section 3 of this act.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
3. The proponent or
proponents of a proposed new county shall, before the circulation of a petition
in support of the formation of that new county, file with the secretary of
state a statement designating the name of the proposed county and containing
the legal description of the proposed county, together with an affidavit from
each proponent that he or she is a registered voter within the territory of the
proposed county. If there are two or more proponents, one of them must be
designated as the principal proponent for the purpose of receiving notices and
communications required by law.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
4. (1) Upon receipt of the
legal description and affidavit of sponsorship for a proposed new county, the
secretary of state shall forward a copy of the legal description to the office
of financial management.

(2) Within thirty days
of receipt of this request from the secretary of state, the director of the
office of financial management shall determine if the legal description is
consistent and the territory described is a single, contiguous area. If the
legal description is defective, the director shall notify the secretary of
state and the principal proponent of the nature and extent of the defect.

(3) If the legal
description is not defective, the director shall also determine the population
of the proposed new county and the population of the remaining portion or
portions of each parent county, using the most current data available. The
director shall certify these populations to the secretary of state and the
principal proponent of the new county within thirty days of receipt of the
request from the secretary of state.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
5. Petitions for the
formation of a new county must be substantially in the following form:

WARNING

Every person who signs
this petition with any other than his or her true name, knowingly signs more
than one petition for the same new county, signs this petition when he or she
is not a registered voter, or makes any false statement on this petition may be
punished by fine or imprisonment or both.

PETITION FOR THE
FORMATION OF ........ COUNTY

To the Honorable ........,
Secretary of State of the State of Washington:

We the undersigned
citizens and legal voters of the state of Washington, respectfully direct that
this petition for the formation of . . . . . county, a
full, true, and correct copy of the legal description of which is printed on
the reverse side of this petition, be transmitted to the legislature of the
state of Washington, at its next ensuing regular session. We respectfully
petition the legislature to create this new county as provided by law. Each of
us for himself or herself declares that: I have personally signed this
petition, I am a legal voter of the state of Washington, my residence address
is correctly stated, and I have not knowingly signed any other petition for the
formation of this county.

Petitioner's │ Print name │ Residence
address,
│ City │

signature │ for positive │ street, and
number,
│ or │ County

│ identification │ if any │ Town │

│ │ │ │

(Here follow
20 numbered lines divided into columns as below.)

│ │ │ │

│ │ │ │

│ │ │ │

│ │ │ │

1B B B B B B B B B B B B B B B B B B B B B B B B B B B B B B B B B

│ │ │ │

│ │ │ │

│ │ │ │

2B B B B B B B B B B B B B B B B B B B B B B B B B B B B B B B B B

│ │ │ │

│ │ │ │

│ │ │ │

3B B B B B B B B B B B B B B B B B B B B B B B B B B B B B B B B B

etc.

A complete legal
description of the proposed county must be printed on the reverse side of the
petition sheet. A map of the proposed new county may be printed on the front
or back of the petition.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
6. Petitions for the
formation of a new county, signed by the requisite number of registered voters
in the proposed county, may be submitted to the secretary of state at any time
up to two years after the certification of the legal description and populations
under section 4 of this act. The standards for acceptance or rejection of
signature petitions for the formation of a new county are the same as for
initiatives under RCW 29.79.150, and any appeal of a refusal by the secretary
of state to file signature petitions will proceed in the same manner as
provided for initiatives under RCW 29.79.160 and 29.79.170.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
7. A petition for the
creation of a new county circulated before the effective date of this act,
filed under section 6 of this act with the secretary of state within two years
of the effective date of this act, and differing in form from the information required
by section 5 of this act is acceptable as to the requirements for form.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
8. A petition proposing the
creation of a new county must be signed by at least fifty percent of the
registered voters residing in the combined portions of each parent county from
which territory is proposed to be stricken and included in the new county.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
9. (1) Every person who
signs a petition requesting the creation of a new county with any other than
his or her true name is guilty of a class C felony punishable under chapter
9A.20 RCW.

(2) Every person who:
(a) Knowingly signs more than one petition for the same effort to create a new
county; (b) signs a petition requesting the creation of a new county knowing
that he or she is not a legal voter; or (c) makes a false statement as to his
or her residence on any petition requesting the creation of a new county, is
guilty of a gross misdemeanor punishable under chapter 9A.20 RCW.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
10. Within sixty days of
receipt of the petition under section 6 of this act, the secretary of state
shall examine the signatures on the petition and determine if the number of
valid signatures of registered voters on the petition exceeds the number
required by section 8 of this act. The secretary of state may contract with
the appropriate county auditor or county auditors to conduct the examination of
the signatures in that county or perform any other functions necessary to
making the determination of the number of valid signatures on the petition. A
variation between the signature on the petition and that on the registration
record due to the substitution of initials or the use of common nicknames is
permitted so long as the surname and handwriting are clearly the same.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
11. (1) The secretary of
state shall certify to the proponents and to the legislature whether the
proposed new county and the remaining parent county or counties will have the
minimum populations required by the state Constitution and whether the petition
has been signed by at least fifty percent of the registered voters in the
combined portions of each parent county that is to be stricken to form the new
county.

(2) The secretary of
state shall also notify the presiding judge of the division of the state court
of appeals that contains the greatest portion of the population of the new
county that a petition for the formation of a new county has been transmitted
to the legislature and shall transmit with the notice a copy of the legal
description of the proposed county.

(3) Any proponent or
opponent of the new county, dissatisfied with the determination of the
secretary of state under this section, may appeal that determination to the
superior court of Thurston county. The review by the superior court will
proceed in the same manner as for initiatives under RCW 29.79.210.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
12. When a division of the court
of appeals is notified under section 11 of this act, the presiding judge shall
appoint a special master to gather facts, conduct hearings, review evidence,
and make recommendations to the court regarding the division of assets and
liabilities between the new county and the parent county or counties in
accordance with sections 13 through 18 of this act. The principal proponent of
the new county and the legislative authority of any parent county or counties
from which territory is to be stricken are proper parties to this proceeding
and may recommend individuals to serve as the special master.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
13. (1) The special master
may employ appraisers, accountants, actuaries, engineers, attorneys, or other
experts, and consult with state and local agencies, to assemble and evaluate
evidence and exercise all other powers otherwise granted to the court that are
necessary for the efficient and just resolution of issues.

(2) The court of
appeals may award payment of fees and costs to any special master and any
experts that the special master is authorized to retain and may assess such
fees and costs against the parent county and the new county in such proportions
as it deems just.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
14. Whenever a new county is
created out of territory that was stricken from another county or counties, the
new county is liable for an equitable proportion of the debts and liabilities
of the parent county or counties and must receive an equitable proportion of
the assets of the parent county or counties.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
15. (1) In apportioning the
debts and liabilities under section 14 of this act, the court shall not charge
either county with any share of debts or liabilities then existing incurred in
the purchase of county property, or in the purchase or construction of public
buildings then in use or under construction, or roads or bridges then in use or
under construction, that are located within the other county except where the
repayment of the debt or liability is being made or is to be made from bonds
originally authorized by a vote of the qualified electors in the other county.

(2) The remaining debts
and liabilities of the parent county must be apportioned so that the new county
is assigned an amount of these debts and liabilities that is in the same
proportion as the assessed valuation of the new county, that was part of that
parent county, is to the total assessed valuation in the parent county before the
creation of the new county. The assessed valuations must be those used for
taxes imposed in the year before the election was held authorizing the creation
of the new county.

(3) This section may
not be construed to affect the rights of creditors.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
16. (1) In apportioning the
assets of the parent county or counties, each parent county retains ownership
of real property it owns that remains in its boundaries after the creation of
the new county. At the effective date of the creation of the new county, the
new county acquires ownership of real property that was owned by the parent
county or counties that is located in the new county. No valuation of or
compensation for real property is required.

(2) All equipment owned
by each parent county that is used in the construction or maintenance of roads
or bridges must be apportioned based on total appraised value of the equipment
between the new county and the parent county so that the new county receives a
portion of this equipment that is in the same proportion as the number of miles
of county roads in the new county, that were part of that parent county, is to
the total number of miles of county roads in the parent county before the
creation of the new county.

(3) All other assets
of each parent county, the apportionment of which is not otherwise provided
for, must be apportioned between the parent county and the new county based on
total appraised value of the assets so that the new county receives a portion of
these assets that is in the same proportion as the assessed valuation of the
new county, that was part of the parent county, is to the total assessed
valuation of the parent county before the creation of the new county. The
assessed valuations must be those used for taxes imposed in the year of the
election authorizing creation of the new county.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
17. (1) Within six months
after receiving notice under section 11(2) of this act, the court of appeals
shall enter an order apportioning all debts, liabilities, and assets of the
parent county or counties between the parent counties and new county and
providing for the method of transfer or payment, subject to the creation of the
new county under section 18 of this act. The order of the court of appeals is
final.

(2) RCW 2.06.040
applies to a proceeding under this section, except that a decision rendered
under this section does not have precedential value and need not be published
as an opinion of the court.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
18. (1) If all the
requirements of Article XI, section 3 of the state Constitution for the
creation of a new county have been met, the legislature may, during the first
regular session after certification under section 11(1) of this act, enact
special legislation creating that county. The legislation may provide that the
creation of the new county is subject to approval by a majority of the voters
in the proposed new county.

(2) If the legislature does
not enact special legislation creating the county under subsection (1) of this
section, the question of the creation of that county must be referred to a vote
of the registered voters residing in the proposed new county at the next
general election more than one hundred twenty days after the adjournment of the
session at which the special legislation could have been enacted.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
19. (1) If the legislature
provides for the creation of a new county under section 18 of this act by
special legislation, that special legislation must include:

(a) A legal description
of the proposed new county;

(b) The initial annual
salaries of the elected officers of the new county;

(c) An initial county
seat for the new county;

(d) Provision for the
initial election of officers of the new county if those are different from
sections 20 through 22 of this act;

(e) Provision for a
superior court and district court for the new county;

(f) Boundaries for
three commissioner districts in the proposed new county subject to the criteria
in RCW 29.70.100(4);

(g) Provision for any
necessary financial resources for the new county during the interim period and
until the receipt of regular taxes and other revenues; and

(h) Any other measures
the legislature finds appropriate to the efficient organization and operation
of the new county government.

(3) All counties must
consist of a single contiguous area of land and water. If the legislature
decides to modify the boundaries of the proposed new county, it shall consider
the economic stability, the efficiency of administration, natural geographic
barriers, transportation corridors, and the boundaries of existing communities
and governmental units, as such factors affect the proposed new county and the
remaining parent county or counties. The legislature may not make changes in
the boundaries that would result in the creation of a new county that does not
satisfy the requirements of Article XI, section 3 of the state Constitution.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
20. If special legislation
enacted under section 18(1) of this act does not provide otherwise or if the
question of the formation of a new county is referred under section 18(2) of
this act, that question must be submitted to the voters of the new county in
substantially the following form:

"Shall the new
county of (insert
name of new county) be created and the assets and liabilities of (insert the name of the
parent county or counties) be divided with this new county as provided in (cite
the order of the court of appeals)? - yes or no?"

NEW SECTION. Sec.
21. (1) If special
legislation enacted under section 18(1) of this act does not provide otherwise
or if the question of the formation of a new county is referred under section
18(2) of this act, a primary must be held under RCW 29.13.070 for the
nomination of candidates for the various county elected offices, and elections
for those offices must be held in conjunction with the state general election
in that year. Except as provided in this section, nominations and elections
must be held as provided by the general election laws for partisan county
offices.

(2) Declarations of
candidacy for the initial terms of office for the elected county offices in the
new county must be filed with the county auditor of the parent county if the
new county is to be created out of territory from only one county and with the
secretary of state if the new county is to be formed out of territory from more
than one parent county.

(3) Candidates for the
office of county commissioner shall file for one of three separate county
commissioner positions. If county commissioner districts were created by the
special legislation, the filing officer shall designate one position for each
district, and the voters in each district shall nominate the candidates for
county commissioner for that district.

(4) If any parent
county does not provide a local voters' pamphlet for the primary or the general
election under chapter 29.81A RCW, the secretary of state shall provide a
pamphlet for the jurisdiction of the proposed new county only.

(5) The county auditor
or auditors shall conduct and canvass the election and certify the results to
the secretary of state, who shall canvass and certify the results of the
primary and the election.

(6) The newly elected
county officials shall assume office immediately upon the certification of the
election with limited powers during the interim period as provided in this
chapter and full powers after the expiration of the interim period.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
22. If the legislature
creates a new county under section 18(1) of this act or if a majority of the
registered voters who reside within the boundaries of the proposed new county
voting on the question vote in favor of creation of a new county under section
18 (1) or (2), the new county is established, with an interim organization
period commencing on January 1st of the year after the session at which the
special legislation was enacted or the election at which the voters approved
the formation of the new county. The interim period expires on December 31st
of the year in which it started.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
23. (1) Except as provided in
subsection (2) of this section, the terms of office for all of the initial
county officials are from the date of the certification of their election until
their successors are elected and qualified at the next general election that is
two years before the year in which the governor is elected.

(2) The commissioner or
commissioners who receive the greatest number of votes for their respective
positions at the general election provided for under section 21 of this act
will receive the longer unexpired term or terms.

(3) No regular or
unexpired term elections may be held during the interim period. Vacancies in
elected county offices will be filled by appointment.

(4) After the
expiration of the first set of unexpired terms, the terms of all officers will
be four years and until their successors are elected and qualified.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
24. If the new county is
created, the new county shall reimburse the parent county or counties for its
share of the primary and election costs under RCW 29.13.045. If the new county
is not created, the parent county or counties shall pay the cost of conducting
the primary and the election to create a new county and elect county officers.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
25. Except as provided in
this section, the creation of a new county may not affect the boundaries of a
city, town, or special district of any kind.

(1) Unless the initial
board of county commissioners provides otherwise, a single road district must
exist in the new county composed of all the unincorporated area within the new
county. Territory that is stricken from a parent county to create a new county
must also be stricken from the road district or districts of the parent county
effective as of the final day of the interim period.

(2) An area in a new
county that was included in a county rural library district must remain part of
that county rural library district. The trustees of such a library district
must be appointed by joint action of the members of the county legislative
authorities of the parent county or counties and the new county, with the vote
on each appointment distributed among the members of the county legislative
authorities so that the combined total vote of all the members of a single
county legislative authority is in direct proportion to the percentage of
population within the library district residing in that county and each member
of that county legislative authority receiving an equal portion of that vote.

(3) Effective on the
first day after the interim period for the creation of a new county, a public
transportation benefit area that includes territory located in both the
remaining parent county and new county will have its boundaries reduced to
eliminate any territory located in the new county.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
26. The superior court and
district court for the new county shall obtain jurisdiction over all new
matters filed on or after the interim period expires, over which those courts
otherwise have jurisdiction under the state Constitution and state law. The superior
court and district court of the parent county or counties shall retain
jurisdiction of any matters pending before them or on appeal from them on
December 31st at the close of the interim period unless all parties to the
matter stipulate to a change of venue to the superior or district court of the
new county.

All pleadings, process,
documents, and files in the office of the county clerk and in the offices of
officers of the superior or district court of a parent county pertaining to
actions and proceedings transferred to the superior or district court of the
new county must be certified and transferred to the county clerk or to officers
of the superior or district court of the new county.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
27. Within ten months of the
beginning of the interim period for a new county, all records, documents, and
papers in the offices of county auditor, county assessor, county treasurer, and
other county officers of a parent county, affecting the title or possession of
real property in the new county, assessed valuation of property located in the
new county, registration of voters residing in the new county, or other
appropriate matters, must be certified by the appropriate parent county
official and must be transferred to the appropriate county officials and
officers of the new county. If original records, documents, or papers are not
transferred, certified copies must be provided. The appropriate county
officials of the parent county and the new county may agree to these transfers
through electronic, mechanical, or other methods that adequately ensure the
accuracy of the transferred information. The new county shall pay all costs
incurred with regard to the transfer of records, documents, and papers.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
28. During the interim period
for a new county, the initial county officials have the following powers:

(1) The initial board
of county commissioners may adopt ordinances and adopt resolutions necessary to
implement the general powers provided by this section. The initial board of
county commissioners may also adopt ordinances on any matter within the
authority of a noncharter county. The ordinances become effective on the
expiration of the interim period.

(2) The initial county
officials, subject to state law governing counties in general, may purchase or
lease land, buildings, equipment, and supplies; contract for services; and
employ staff as necessary to implement the powers provided by this section and
to assure the establishment of the necessary infrastructure and staffing for
the full operation of county government on the expiration of the interim
period.

(3) The initial county
officials may enter interlocal agreements with the parent county or counties to
facilitate the establishment of the new county government and for services to
be rendered following the interim period.

(4) The initial board
of county commissioners may:

(a) Cause tax
anticipation or revenue anticipation notes or warrants or other short-term
obligations to be issued as provided in chapter 39.50 RCW;

(b) Authorize the
borrowing of money from state or federal agencies to the same extent as is
authorized for a nonhome-rule county;

(c) Submit ballot
propositions to the voters of the new county authorizing a single-year excess
levy to be imposed, as provided by RCW 84.52.052;

(d) Submit ballot
propositions to the voters of the new county authorizing both voter-approved
general indebtedness and bond retirement excess levies, as provided by RCW
84.52.056 and 39.36.050;

(e) Impose property
taxes as authorized for counties, to be collected after the interim period; and

(f) Impose excise taxes
as authorized for counties effective on January 1st after the interim period,
including, but not limited to, sales and use taxes authorized in chapter 82.14
RCW and real estate excise taxes authorized in chapter 82.46 RCW.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
29. The initial county
officers of a new county during the interim period are subject to all state laws
limiting the authority of or imposing obligations on such offices as if the new
county were fully established.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
30. All ordinances, rules,
and regulations of a parent county that are in effect at the beginning of the
interim period for a new county and that are adopted by the parent county
during the interim period of a new county have their full force and effect within
the portion of the parent county that is stricken to form the new county until
the end of the interim period, unless repealed by the parent county before that
date.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
31. During the interim period
for a new county, the parent county or counties remains responsible for
providing all county services previously provided by that parent county in the
portion of the parent county that is stricken to form a new county at the
current level of service, unless otherwise agreed to between the parent county
and the initial officers of the new county.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
32. (1) The budget for the
interim period for a new county must be adopted as provided in this section.
The budget for the first budget cycle of the new county after the interim
period must be adopted as provided in chapter 36.40 RCW.

(2) The initial board
of county commissioners shall adopt a budget for the interim period and make
any subsequent amendments in consultation with the state auditor and the
department of community, trade, and economic development. The department of
community, trade, and economic development shall provide to the initial
officers of the new county, at the earliest date feasible after the election
authorizing formation of the new county, a report detailing the potential
revenues and expenses of the new county. The interim period budget may
initially authorize expenditure of moneys by general category without specific
detail. The budget may be amended periodically during the interim period to
reflect actual revenues or expenditure requirements as they become known.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
33. During the interim period
for a new county, the initial board of county commissioners may borrow money
from the state treasurer in amounts and on terms deemed prudent and reasonable
by the state treasurer.

Any loan obtained under
this section must be repaid within three years of the initial disbursement.
The state treasurer may withhold moneys from the funds otherwise payable to the
new county to assure repayment.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
34. Each parent county shall
continue imposing sales and use taxes throughout its entire boundaries until
the end of the interim period. Before the end of the interim period, each
parent county will continue receiving federal and state moneys allocated to it
as if the new county did not exist. State moneys must be allocated to the new
county on whatever basis these moneys are distributed commencing on the first
day after the interim period.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
35. The rule of strict
construction does not apply to this chapter. The authority granted to the
initial county commissioners of a new county must be liberally interpreted to
provide for a transition to a new county during the interim period so that, to
the greatest extent possible, a new county will be able to fully function as a
complete county government at the date the new county is officially created.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
36. A new section is added
to chapter 47.01 RCW to read as follows:

Beginning on January
1st following the interim period for a new county, the department of
transportation shall adjust the allocations of transportation moneys made to
counties to include the new county on the same bases as apply to previously
existing counties.

Sec. 37. RCW 36.32.020 and 1982 c
226 s 4 are each amended to read as follows:

The board of county
commissioners of each county shall divide their county into three commissioner
districts so that each district shall comprise as nearly as possible one-third
of the population of the county((: PROVIDED, That)). The
territory comprised in any voting precincts of such districts shall remain
compact, and shall not be divided by the lines of said districts.

However, the commissioners
of any county composed entirely of islands and with a population of less than
thirty-five thousand may divide their county into three commissioner districts
without regard to population, except that if any single island is included in
more than one district, the districts on such island shall comprise, as nearly
as possible, equal populations.

The lines
of the districts shall not be changed ((oftener)) more often than
once in four years except for the initial districts in a new county created
under section 18 of this act and only when a full board of commissioners is
present. The districts shall be designated as districts numbered one, two,
and three.

Sec. 38. RCW 84.09.030 and 1996 c
230 s 1613 are each amended to read as follows:

Except as follows, the
boundaries of counties, cities and all other taxing districts, for purposes of
property taxation and the levy of property taxes, shall be the established official
boundaries of such districts existing on the first day of March of the year in
which the property tax levy is made.

The official boundaries
of a newly incorporated taxing district shall be established at a different
date in the year in which the incorporation occurred as follows:

(1) Boundaries for a
newly incorporated city shall be established on the last day of March of the
year in which the initial property tax levy is made, and the boundaries of a
road district, library district, or fire protection district or districts, that
include any portion of the area that was incorporated within its boundaries
shall be altered as of this date to exclude this area, if the budget for the
newly incorporated city is filed pursuant to RCW 84.52.020 and the levy request
of the newly incorporated city is made pursuant to RCW 84.52.070. Whenever a
proposed city incorporation is on the March special election ballot, the county
auditor shall submit the legal description of the proposed city to the
department of revenue on or before the first day of March;

(2) Boundaries for a
newly incorporated port district shall be established on the first day of
October if the boundaries of the newly incorporated port district are
coterminous with the boundaries of another taxing district, as they existed on
the first day of March of that year;

(3) Boundaries of any
other newly incorporated taxing district shall be established on the first day
of June of the year in which the property tax levy is made if the taxing
district has boundaries coterminous with the boundaries of another taxing
district, as they existed on the first day of March of that year;

(4) Boundaries for a
newly incorporated water-sewer district shall be established on the fifteenth
of June of the year in which the proposition under RCW 57.04.050 authorizing a
water district excess levy is approved; and

(5) Boundaries of a
new county, the counties from which territory is stricken to create the new
county, any road districts in the counties from which the territory is
stricken, and road districts in the newly created county will be established on
the first day of January of the interim period after the formation of that new
county.

The boundaries of a
taxing district shall be established on the first day of June if territory has
been added to, or removed from, the taxing district after the first day of
March of that year with boundaries coterminous with the boundaries of another
taxing district as they existed on the first day of March of that year.
However, the boundaries of a road district, library district, or fire
protection district or districts, that include any portion of the area that was
annexed to a city or town within its boundaries shall be altered as of this
date to exclude this area. In any case where any instrument setting forth the
official boundaries of any newly established taxing district, or setting forth
any change in such boundaries, is required by law to be filed in the office of
the county auditor or other county official, said instrument shall be filed in
triplicate. The officer with whom such instrument is filed shall transmit two
copies to the county assessor.

No property tax levy
shall be made for any taxing district whose boundaries are not established as
of the dates provided in this section.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
39. The following acts or
parts of acts are each repealed:

(1) RCW 4.12.070 (Change to newly created
county) and 1891 c 33 s 2, Code 1881 s 53, 1877 p 12 s 54, 1869 p 14 s 54,
& 1854 p 377 s 2;

(2) RCW 36.09.010 (Debts and property to be
apportioned) and 1963 c 4 s 36.09.010;

(3) RCW 36.09.020 (Procedure to settle
amount charged new county--Basis of apportionment) and 1963 c 4 s 36.09.020;

(4) RCW 36.09.035 (Procedure to settle
amount charged new county--Disagreement between auditors--Determination by
third person) and 1963 c 4 s 36.09.035;

(5) RCW 36.09.040 (Payment of
indebtedness--Transfer of property) and 1963 c 4 s 36.09.040; and

(6) RCW 36.09.050 (Collection of taxes
levied--Apportionment) and 1963 c 4 s 36.09.050.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
40. Sections 2 through 35 of
this act are added to chapter 36.09 RCW.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 41. If any provision of this
act or its application to any person or circumstance is held invalid, the
remainder of the act or the application of the provision to other persons or
circumstances is not affected.

---
END ---