BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF
WASHINGTON:

_7 Sec. 1. RCW
41.05.011 and 2000 c 230 s 3 are each amended to read

_8 as follows:

_9 Unless the context clearly requires otherwise, the
definitions

10 in this section shall apply throughout this chapter.

11 (1) "Administrator" means the
administrator of the authority.

12 (2) "State purchased health care" or
"health care" means

13 medical and health care, pharmaceuticals, and medical
equipment

14 purchased with state and federal funds by the department
of social

15 and health services, the department of health, the basic
health

16 plan, the state health care authority, the department of
labor and

17 industries, the department of corrections, the
department of

18 veterans affairs, and local school districts.

p. 1 HB
1811

_1 (3) "Authority" means the Washington state
health care

_2 authority.

_3 (4) "Insuring entity" means an insurer as
defined in chapter

_4 48.01 RCW, a health care service contractor as defined
in chapter

_5 48.44 RCW, or a health maintenance organization as
defined in

_6 chapter 48.46 RCW.

_7 (5) "Flexible benefit plan" means a
benefit plan that allows

_8 employees to choose the level of health care coverage
provided and

_9 the amount of employee contributions from among a range
of choices

10 offered by the authority.

11 (6) "Employee" includes all full-time and
career seasonal

12 employees of the state, whether or not covered by civil
service;

13 elected and appointed officials of the executive branch
of

14 government, including full-time members of boards,
commissions, or

15 committees; and includes any or all part-time and
temporary

16 employees under the terms and conditions established
under this

17 chapter by the authority; justices of the supreme court
and judges

18 of the court of appeals and the superior courts; and
members of

19 the state legislature or of the legislative authority of
any

20 county, city, or town who are elected to office after
February 20,

21 1970. "Employee" also includes: (a)
Employees of a county,

22 municipality, or other political subdivision of the
state if the

23 legislative authority of the county, municipality, or
other

24 political subdivision of the state seeks and receives
the approval

25 of the authority to provide any of its insurance
programs by

26 contract with the authority, as provided in RCW
41.04.205; (b)

27 employees of employee organizations representing state
civil

28 service employees, at the option of each such employee

29 organization, and, effective October 1, 1995, employees
of

30 employee organizations currently pooled with employees
of school

31 districts for the purpose of purchasing insurance
benefits, at the

32 option of each such employee organization; and (c)
employees of a

33 school district if the authority agrees to provide any
of the

34 school districts' insurance programs by contract with
the

35 authority as provided in RCW 28A.400.350.

36 (7) "Board" means the public employees'
benefits board

37 established under RCW 41.05.055.

38 (8) "Retired or disabled school employee"
means:

HB 1811 p. 2

_1 (a) Persons who separated from employment with a
school

_2 district or educational service district and are
receiving a

_3 retirement allowance under chapter 41.32 or 41.40 RCW as
of

_4 September 30, 1993;

_5 (b) Persons who separate from employment with a
school district

_6 or educational service district on or after October 1,
1993, and

_7 immediately upon separation receive a retirement
allowance under

_8 chapter 41.32, 41.35, or 41.40 RCW;

_9 (c) Persons who separate from employment with a
school district

10 or educational service district due to a total and
permanent

11 disability, and are eligible to receive a deferred
retirement

12 allowance under chapter 41.32, 41.35, or 41.40 RCW.

13 (9) "Benefits contribution plan" means a
premium only

14 contribution plan, a medical flexible spending
arrangement, or a

15 cafeteria plan whereby state and public employees may
agree to a

16 contribution to benefit costs which will allow the
employee to

17 participate in benefits offered pursuant to 26 U.S.C.
Sec. 125 or

18 other sections of the internal revenue code.

19 (10) "Salary" means a state employee's
monthly salary or wages.

20 (11) "Participant" means an individual who
fulfills the

21 eligibility and enrollment requirements under the
benefits

22 contribution plan.

23 (12) "Plan year" means the time period
established by the

24 authority.

25 (13) "Separated employees" means persons
who separate from

26 employment with an employer as defined in:

27 (a)(i) RCW 41.32.010(11) on or after July 1,
1996; or

28 (((b))) (ii) RCW 41.35.010 on or after
September 1, 2000;

29 and who are at least age fifty-five and have at least
ten years of

30 service under the teachers' retirement system plan 3 as
defined in

31 RCW 41.32.010(40) or the Washington school employees'
retirement

32 system plan 3 as defined in RCW 41.35.010; or

33 (b) For the purposes of RCW 41.05.080:

34 (i) RCW 41.32.010(11) on or after the effective
date of this

35 act; or

36 (ii) RCW 41.35.010 on or after the effective date
of this act;

37 and who are at least age fifty-five and have at least
ten years of

p. 3 HB
1811

_1 service under the teachers' retirement system plan 2
as defined in

_2 RCW 41.32.010 or the Washington school employees'
retirement

_3 system plan 2 as defined in RCW 41.35.010.

_4 Sec. 2. RCW
41.05.011 and 2000 c 247 s 604 and 2000 c 230 s 3 are

_5 each reenacted and amended to read as follows:

_6 Unless the context clearly requires otherwise, the
definitions

_7 in this section shall apply throughout this chapter.

_8 (1) "Administrator" means the
administrator of the authority.

_9 (2) "State purchased health care" or
"health care" means

10 medical and health care, pharmaceuticals, and medical
equipment

11 purchased with state and federal funds by the department
of social

12 and health services, the department of health, the basic
health

13 plan, the state health care authority, the department of
labor and

14 industries, the department of corrections, the department
of

15 veterans affairs, and local school districts.

16 (3) "Authority" means the Washington state
health care

17 authority.

18 (4) "Insuring entity" means an insurer as
defined in chapter

19 48.01 RCW, a health care service contractor as defined
in chapter

20 48.44 RCW, or a health maintenance organization as
defined in

21 chapter 48.46 RCW.

22 (5) "Flexible benefit plan" means a
benefit plan that allows

23 employees to choose the level of health care coverage
provided and

24 the amount of employee contributions from among a range
of choices

25 offered by the authority.

26 (6) "Employee" includes all full-time and
career seasonal

27 employees of the state, whether or not covered by civil
service;

28 elected and appointed officials of the executive branch
of

29 government, including full-time members of boards,
commissions, or

30 committees; and includes any or all part-time and
temporary

31 employees under the terms and conditions established
under this

32 chapter by the authority; justices of the supreme court
and judges

33 of the court of appeals and the superior courts; and
members of

34 the state legislature or of the legislative authority of
any

35 county, city, or town who are elected to office after
February 20,

36 1970. "Employee" also includes: (a)
Employees of a county,

37 municipality, or other political subdivision of the
state if the

HB 1811 p. 4

_1 legislative authority of the county, municipality, or
other

_2 political subdivision of the state seeks and receives
the approval

_3 of the authority to provide any of its insurance
programs by

_4 contract with the authority, as provided in RCW
41.04.205; (b)

_5 employees of employee organizations representing state
civil

_6 service employees, at the option of each such employee

_7 organization, and, effective October 1, 1995, employees
of

_8 employee organizations currently pooled with employees
of school

_9 districts for the purpose of purchasing insurance
benefits, at the

10 option of each such employee organization; and (c)
employees of a

11 school district if the authority agrees to provide any
of the

12 school districts' insurance programs by contract with
the

13 authority as provided in RCW 28A.400.350.

14 (7) "Board" means the public employees'
benefits board

15 established under RCW 41.05.055.

16 (8) "Retired or disabled school employee"
means:

17 (a) Persons who separated from employment with a
school

18 district or educational service district and are
receiving a

19 retirement allowance under chapter 41.32 or 41.40 RCW as
of

20 September 30, 1993;

21 (b) Persons who separate from employment with a
school district

22 or educational service district on or after October 1,
1993, and

23 immediately upon separation receive a retirement
allowance under

24 chapter 41.32, 41.35, or 41.40 RCW;

25 (c) Persons who separate from employment with a
school district

26 or educational service district due to a total and
permanent

27 disability, and are eligible to receive a deferred retirement

28 allowance under chapter 41.32, 41.35, or 41.40 RCW.

29 (9) "Benefits contribution plan" means a
premium only

30 contribution plan, a medical flexible spending
arrangement, or a

31 cafeteria plan whereby state and public employees may
agree to a

32 contribution to benefit costs which will allow the
employee to

33 participate in benefits offered pursuant to 26 U.S.C.
Sec. 125 or

34 other sections of the internal revenue code.

35 (10) "Salary" means a state employee's
monthly salary or wages.

36 (11) "Participant" means an individual who
fulfills the

37 eligibility and enrollment requirements under the
benefits

38 contribution plan.

p. 5 HB
1811

_1 (12) "Plan year" means the time period
established by the

_2 authority.

_3 (13) "Separated employees" means persons
who separate from

_4 employment with an employer as defined in:

_5 (a)(i) RCW 41.32.010(11) on or after July 1,
1996; or

_6 (((b))) (ii) RCW 41.35.010 on or after
September 1, 2000; or

_7 (((c))) (iii) RCW 41.40.010 on or
after March 1, 2002;

_8 and who are at least age fifty-five and have at least
ten years of

_9 service under the teachers' retirement system plan 3 as
defined in

10 RCW 41.32.010(40), the Washington school employees'
retirement

11 system plan 3 as defined in RCW 41.35.010, or the public

12 employees' retirement system plan 3 as defined in RCW
41.40.010;

13 or

14 (b) For the purposes of RCW 41.05.080:

15 (i) RCW 41.32.010(11) on or after the effective
date of this

16 act; or

17 (ii) RCW 41.35.010 on or after the effective date
of this act;

18 or

19 (iii) RCW 41.40.010 on or after March 1, 2002;

20 and who are at least age fifty-five and have at least
ten years of

21 service under the teachers' retirement system plan 2
as defined in

22 RCW 41.32.010, the Washington school employees'
retirement system

23 plan 2 as defined in RCW 41.35.010, or the public
employees'

24 retirement system plan 2 as defined in RCW 41.40.010.

25 NEW SECTION. Sec. 3. Section 1 of this act
expires March 1,

26 2002.

27 NEW SECTION. Sec. 4. Section 2 of this act
takes effect March

28 1, 2002.

‑‑‑ END ‑‑‑

HB 1811 p. 6