BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF
WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec.
1. The legislature finds
that administrative rules adopted by state agencies can have a disproportionate
impact on local governments due to the financial burdens of providing services
to its citizens. This disproportionate impact reduces service levels, forces
employee reductions, and threatens the very existence of some small
jurisdictions. The legislature therefore enacts the local government regulatory
fairness act with the intent of reducing the disproportionate impact of state
administrative rules on local governments.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
2. The definitions in this
section apply throughout this chapter unless the context clearly requires
otherwise.

(1) "Agency"
means any state board, commission, department, institution of higher education,
or office, authorized by law to make rules or conduct adjudicative proceedings,
except those in the legislative or judicial branch.

(2) "Local
government" means any political subdivision or unit of local government of
this state including, but not limited to, municipal corporations,
quasi-municipal corporations, special purpose districts, and local service
districts.

Sec. 3. RCW 34.05.320 and 1995 c
403 s 302 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) At least twenty
days before the rule-making hearing at which the agency receives public comment
regarding adoption of a rule, the agency shall cause notice of the hearing to
be published in the state register. The publication constitutes the proposal
of a rule. The notice shall include all of the following:

(a) A title, a description
of the rule's purpose, and any other information which may be of assistance in
identifying the rule or its purpose;

(b) Citations of the
statutory authority for adopting the rule and the specific statute the rule is
intended to implement;

(c) A summary of the
rule and a statement of the reasons supporting the proposed action;

(d) The agency
personnel, with their office location and telephone number, who are responsible
for the drafting, implementation, and enforcement of the rule;

(e) The name of the
person or organization, whether private, public, or governmental, proposing the
rule;

(f) Agency comments or
recommendations, if any, regarding statutory language, implementation,
enforcement, and fiscal matters pertaining to the rule;

(g) Whether the rule is
necessary as the result of federal law or federal or state court action, and if
so, a copy of such law or court decision shall be attached to the purpose
statement;

(h) When, where, and
how persons may present their views on the proposed rule;

(i) The date on which
the agency intends to adopt the rule;

(j) A short explanation
of the rule, its purpose, and anticipated effects, including in the case of a
proposal that would modify existing rules, a short description of the changes
the proposal would make;

(k) A copy of the
local government impact statement prepared under section 6 of this act;

(l) A copy of
the small business economic impact statement prepared under chapter 19.85 RCW,
or an explanation for why the agency did not prepare the statement; and

(((l))) (m)
A statement indicating whether RCW 34.05.328 applies to the rule adoption.

(2) Upon filing notice
of the proposed rule with the code reviser, the adopting agency shall have
copies of the notice on file and available for public inspection and shall
forward three copies of the notice to the rules review committee.

(3) No later than three
days after its publication in the state register, the agency shall cause a copy
of the notice of proposed rule adoption to be mailed to each person, city, and
county that has made a request to the agency for a mailed copy of such
notices. An agency may charge for the actual cost of providing a requesting
party mailed copies of these notices.

(4) In addition to the
notice required by subsections (1) and (2) of this section, an institution of
higher education shall cause the notice to be published in the campus or
standard newspaper of the institution at least seven days before the
rule-making hearing.

Sec. 4. RCW 43.135.060 and 1998
c 321 s 15 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) After July 1, 1995,
the legislature, or a state agency through the rule-making process,
shall not impose responsibility for new programs or increased levels of service
under existing programs on any political subdivision of the state unless the
subdivision is fully reimbursed by the state for the costs of the new programs
or increases in service levels. Reimbursement by the state may be made by:
(a) A specific appropriation; ((or)) (b) increases in state
distributions of revenue to political subdivisions occurring after January 1,
1998; or (c) funding from the state agency.

(2) If by order of any
court, or legislative enactment, the costs of a federal or local government
program are transferred to or from the state, the otherwise applicable state
expenditure limit shall be increased or decreased, as the case may be, by the
dollar amount of the costs of the program.

(3) The legislature, in
consultation with the office of financial management or its successor agency,
shall determine the costs of any new programs or increased levels of service
under existing programs imposed on any political subdivision or transferred to
or from the state.

(4) Subsection (1) of
this section does not apply to the costs incurred for voting devices or
machines under RCW 29.04.200.

(5) For the purposes
of this section:

(a)
"Agency" means any state board, commission, department, institution
of higher education, or office, authorized by law to make rules or conduct
adjudicative proceedings, except those in the legislative or judicial branch;
and

(b) "Local
government" means any political subdivision or unit of local government of
this state including, but not limited to, municipal corporations,
quasi-municipal corporations, special purpose districts, and local service
districts.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
5. Proposed rules to be
adopted by state agencies that have a fiscal impact greater than fifty thousand
dollars, as determined by the local government impact statement, may not be
imposed without full reimbursement according to RCW 43.135.060.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
6. (1) In the adoption of a
rule under chapter 34.05 RCW, an agency shall prepare a local government impact
statement if: (a) The proposed rule will impose more than minor costs on local
governments; or (b) requested to do so by a majority vote of the joint
administrative rules review committee within forty-five days of receiving the
notice of proposed rule making under RCW 34.05.320.

An agency shall prepare
the local government impact statement, and file it with the office of the code
reviser along with the notice required under RCW 34.05.320. An agency shall
file a statement prepared at the request of the joint administrative rules
review committee with the office of the code reviser upon its completion before
the adoption of the rule. An agency shall provide a copy of the local
government impact statement to any person requesting it.

(2) Based upon the
extent of disproportionate impact on local governments identified in the
statement prepared under this chapter, the agency shall, where legal and
feasible in meeting the stated objectives of the statutes upon which the rule
is based, reduce the costs imposed by the rule on local governments. Methods
to reduce the costs on local governments may include:

(a) Reducing,
modifying, or eliminating substantive regulatory requirements;

(b) Delaying compliance
timetables;

(c) Eliminating agency
review requirements; or

(d) Any other
mitigation techniques.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
7. (1) A local government
impact statement must include a brief description of the reporting,
recordkeeping, and other compliance requirements of the proposed rule, and the
kinds of regulatory changes a local government would need to implement to
comply with such requirements. It shall analyze the costs of compliance for
local governments required to comply with the proposed rule, including costs of
labor, planning, implementation, court defense, and administrative costs. It
shall consider, based on input received from local governments affected,
whether compliance with the rule will result in a total cost of fifty thousand
dollars or more to any one jurisdiction.

(2) A local government
impact statement must also include:

(a) A statement of the
steps taken by the agency to reduce the costs of the rule on local
jurisdictions as required by section 6 of this act, or reasonable justification
for not doing so, addressing the options listed in section 6 of this act;

(b) A description of
how the agency will involve local governments in the development of the rule;
and

(c) A list of local
governments that will be required to comply with the rule.

(3) To obtain
information for purposes of this section, an agency may survey a representative
sample of affected local governments or their associations, and should,
whenever possible, appoint a committee under RCW 34.05.310(2) to assist in the
accurate assessment of the costs of a proposed rule, and the means to reduce
the costs imposed on local governments.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
8. This chapter may be known
and cited as the local government regulatory fairness act of 2001.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
9. Sections 1, 2, and 5
through 8 of this act constitute a new chapter in Title 34 RCW.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 10. If any provision of this
act or its application to any person or circumstance is held invalid, the
remainder of the act or the application of the provision to other persons or
circumstances is not affected.

---
END ---