BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF
WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1. RCW 9A.36.031 and 1999 c
328 s 1 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) A person is guilty
of assault in the third degree if he or she, under circumstances not amounting
to assault in the first or second degree:

(a) With intent to
prevent or resist the execution of any lawful process or mandate of any court
officer or the lawful apprehension or detention of himself or another person,
assaults another; or

(b) Assaults a person
employed as a transit operator or driver, the immediate supervisor of a transit
operator or driver, a mechanic, or a security officer, by a public or private
transit company or a contracted transit service provider, while that person is
performing his or her official duties at the time of the assault; or

(c) Assaults a school
bus driver, the immediate supervisor of a driver, a mechanic, or a security
officer, employed by a school district transportation service or a private
company under contract for transportation services with a school district, while
the person is performing his or her official duties at the time of the assault;
or

(d) With criminal
negligence, causes bodily harm to another person by means of a weapon or other
instrument or thing likely to produce bodily harm; or

(e) Assaults a fire
fighter or other employee of a fire department, county fire marshal's office,
county fire prevention bureau, or fire protection district who was performing
his or her official duties at the time of the assault; or

(f) With criminal
negligence, causes bodily harm accompanied by substantial pain that extends for
a period sufficient to cause considerable suffering; or

(g) Assaults a law
enforcement officer or other employee of a law enforcement agency who was
performing his or her official duties at the time of the assault; or

(h) Assaults a nurse,
physician, or health care provider who was performing his or her nursing or
health care duties at the time of the assault and which duties did not
include care for persons with mental disabilities, including developmental
disabilities or mental illness, organic brain syndromes, neurological
disorders, traumatic brain injury, and dementia. For purposes of this
subsection: "Nurse" means a person licensed under chapter 18.79 RCW;
"physician" means a person licensed under chapter 18.57 or 18.71 RCW;
and "health care provider" means a person certified under chapter
18.71 or 18.73 RCW who performs emergency medical services or a person
regulated under Title 18 RCW and employed by, or contracting with, a hospital
licensed under chapter 70.41 RCW.

(2)
Assault in the third degree is a class C felony.

--- END ---