BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF
WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec.
1. The legislature finds
that a supportive learning environment enhances student academic achievement.
A supportive learning environment is one that is safe, civil, healthy, and
intellectually stimulating where students are engaged in learning and are
committed to acquiring the knowledge, attitudes, skills, and behaviors to
succeed in the twenty-first century.

The legislature intends
to improve the student learning environment by helping school districts
implement comprehensive safe school plans that assist schools in providing a
safe learning environment.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
2. A new section is added
to chapter 28A.320 RCW to read as follows:

A consistent
comprehensive approach to school safety includes a comprehensive safe school
plan and implementation of the plan covering prevention, intervention, all
hazards and crisis response, and postcrisis recovery. Staff, students,
parents, the community, law enforcement, and emergency preparedness shall be
involved in the development and implementation of the plan.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
3. A new section is added
to chapter 28A.320 RCW to read as follows:

(1) To the extent funds
are appropriated for this purpose, each local school board shall establish a
policy requiring that each school in its district develop a written
comprehensive safe school plan consistent with this section.

(2) The school district
board of directors shall establish a process for approval of individual school
plans. Plans shall be approved by September 1, 2002. Once approved, the
school district shall develop a process to inform students, staff, volunteers,
and parents about its comprehensive safe school plans.

(3) Each school shall
annually conduct an evaluation of its comprehensive safe school plan and
conduct reviews, drills, or simulated practices in coordination with local
fire, law enforcement, medical, and emergency management agencies. Districts
also shall annually provide information on the implementation and evaluation of
the plans to parents and students.

(4) Each school shall
maintain a copy of its comprehensive safe school plan and documentation of
yearly reviews, drills, or simulated practices within the office of the school
principal and shall make a copy of the report available for review upon written
request.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
4. A new section is added
to chapter 28A.300 RCW to read as follows:

To the extent funds are
appropriated for this purpose, a school safety center shall be established to
provide school districts with: The assistance necessary to create a
consistent, comprehensive approach to school safety for every school and every
school district; the means to share safety information among school districts;
and a process for schools to effectively integrate safe school planning with
emergency preparedness personnel, the criminal justice training commission, and
local, county, and state law enforcement officers.

The safety center shall
disseminate successful models of school safety plans and cooperative efforts;
provide assistance to schools to establish a comprehensive safe school plan;
select models of cooperative efforts that have been proven successful; act as
an information dissemination and resource center when an incident occurs in a
school district either in Washington or in another state; coordinate activities
relating to school safety; review and approve manuals and curricula used for
school safety models and training; and develop and maintain a school safety
information web site.

The school safety
center shall be established in the office of the superintendent of public
instruction. The superintendent of public instruction shall appoint and
participate in a school safety center advisory committee that includes, but is
not limited to, representatives of educators, other school staff,
administrators, the American society for industrial security, the state
criminal justice training commission, law enforcement agencies, and others
deemed appropriate and approved by the school safety center advisory
committee. The advisory committee shall select a chair.

The school safety
center advisory committee shall develop a training program, using the best
practices in school safety, for all school safety personnel.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
5. A new section is added
to chapter 28A.300 RCW to read as follows:

To the extent funds are
appropriated for this purpose, the office of the superintendent of public
instruction shall contract with an independent vendor to establish the school
safety hotline. The office of the superintendent of public instruction, with the
recommendations of the school safety center advisory committee, shall develop
the request for proposal to obtain hotline services. The hotline shall include
the maintenance and operation of a toll-free, confidential hotline available
for students, parents, school personnel, and community members to report
information, including anonymous tips, on any activity threatening a school,
students, visitors, or personnel, including suicide.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
6. A new section is added
to chapter 28A.320 RCW to read as follows:

To the extent funds are
appropriated, a per pupil allocation shall be distributed to each school
district, however no school district may be allocated less than two thousand
dollars. School districts shall use the funds to carry out district activities
to develop and implement a comprehensive safe school plan.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 7. If specific funding for
the purposes of this act, referencing this act by bill or chapter number, is
not provided by June 30, 2001, in the omnibus appropriations act, this act is
null and void.

---
END ---