BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF
WASHINGTON:

_4 NEW SECTION. Sec. 1. A new section is
added to chapter 43.180

_5 RCW to read as follows:

_6 (1) The commission, in cooperation with the state
investment

_7 board, shall develop and implement a housing finance
program that:

_8 (a) Provides subsidized or unsubsidized mortgage
financing for

_9 single-family home ownership, including a single condominium
unit,

10 located in the state of Washington;

11 (b) Requests the state investment board to make
investments,

12 within its policies and investment guidelines, in
mortgage-backed

13 securities that are collateralized by loans made within
the state

14 of Washington; and

15 (c) Provides flexible loan underwriting guidelines,
including,

16 but not limited to, provisions that will allow reduced
downpayment

17 requirements for the purchaser.

18 (2) The housing finance program developed under
subsection (1)

19 of this section shall:

p. 1 HB
1819

_1 (a) Be limited to active participants of the
Washington state

_2 teachers= retirement system under
chapter 41.32 RCW;

_3 (b) Be limited to borrowers with incomes that do not
exceed one

_4 hundred fifteen percent of the state or county median
family

_5 income, whichever is higher, adjusted for family size;
and

_6 (c) Be limited to first-time home buyers as defined
in RCW

_7 43.185A.010.

_8 (3) The commission, to the extent funds are
available, may

_9 provide either down payment or closing costs' assistance
to

10 households eligible for assistance under this chapter.

11 (4) The commission, in cooperation with the
department of

12 retirement systems, shall notify active participants of
the

13 Washington state teachers=
retirement system of the availability of

14 mortgage financing through this section.

15 (5) This section may be known and cited as the Washington
state

16 teachers= mortgage loan program.

17 Sec. 2. RCW
43.33A.080 and 1987 c 29 s 2 are each amended to read

18 as follows:

19 The state investment board may invest those funds
which are not

20 under constitutional prohibition in: (1) Farm ownership
and soil

21 and water conservation loans fully guaranteed as to
principal and

22 interest under the Bankhead-Jones farm tenant act
administered by

23 the United States department of agriculture; and (2) ((the

24 Washington land bank established by chapter 31.30 RCW))
subsidized

25 and unsubsidized mortgage loans made under section 1
of this act

26 that are secured by residential mortgage-backed
securities

27 administered by the federal national mortgage
association, the

28 government national mortgage association, or the
federal home loan

29 mortgage corporation.

30 Sec. 3. RCW
43.180.240 and 1994 c 235 s 3 are each amended to read

31 as follows:

32 (1) The commission shall submit to the legislature
in its

33 annual report a summary of the progress of the housing
finance

34 programs developed under RCW 43.180.220 and
section 1 of this act.

35 The report shall include, but not be limited to the
number of

HB 1819 p. 2

_1 loans made and location of property financed under RCW
43.180.220

_2 and ((43.180.230)) section 1 of this act.

_3 (2) The commission shall take such steps as are
necessary to

_4 ensure that RCW 43.180.220 and 43.180.230 are
implemented on June

_5 9, 1994.

_6 (3) The commission shall take necessary steps to
ensure that

_7 section 1 of this act is implemented by September 1,
2001.

_8 NEW SECTION. Sec. 4. If any provision of
this act or its

_9 application to any person or circumstance is held
invalid, the

10 remainder of the act or the application of the provision
to other

11 persons or circumstances is not affected.

‑‑‑ END ‑‑‑

p. 3 HB
1819