BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF
WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1. RCW 15.58.060 and 1989 c
380 s 4 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) The applicant for
registration shall file a statement with the department which shall include:

(a) The name and
address of the applicant and the name and address of the person whose name will
appear on the label, if other than the applicant's;

(b) The name of the
pesticide;

(c) The complete
formula of the pesticide, including a listing of the active and inert
ingredients((: PROVIDED, That confidential business information of a
proprietary nature is not made available to any other person and is exempt from
disclosure as a public record, as provided by RCW 42.17.260)) and the
percentages of each ingredient. Except as provided in RCW 15.58.065 and
section 3 of this act, this information will be kept confidential and is exempt
from disclosure as a public record as provided by RCW 42.17.260. Information
required by this subsection may be submitted on company letterhead marked
"confidential" in red ink on each sheet or each "EPA
Confidential Statement of Formula" information sheet;

(d) Other necessary
information required for completion of the department's application for
registration form; and

(e) A complete copy of
the labeling accompanying the pesticide and a statement of all claims to be
made for it, including the directions and precautions for use.

(2) The director may
require a full description of the tests made and the results thereof upon which
the claims are based.

(3) The director may
prescribe other necessary information by rule.

Sec. 2. RCW 15.58.065 and 1989 c
380 s 5 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) In submitting data
required by this chapter, the applicant may:

(a) Mark clearly any
portions which in the applicant's opinion are trade secrets or commercial or
financial information; and

(b) Submit such marked
material separately from other material required to be submitted under this
chapter.

(2) Except under
section 3 of this act and notwithstanding any other provision of this
chapter or other law, the director shall not make public information which in
the director's judgment should be privileged or confidential because it
contains or relates to trade secrets or commercial or financial information
except that, when necessary to carry out the provisions of this chapter,
information relating to unpublished formulas of products acquired by
authorization of this chapter may be revealed to any state or federal agency
consulted and may be revealed at a public hearing or in findings of fact issued
by the director when necessary under this chapter.

(3) Except under
section 3 of this act, if the director proposes to release for inspection
information which the applicant or registrant believes to be protected from
disclosure under subsection (2) of this section, the director shall notify the
applicant or registrant in writing, by certified mail. The director shall not
thereafter make available for inspection such data until thirty days after
receipt of the notice by the applicant or registrant. During this period, the
applicant or registrant may institute an action in the superior court of Thurston
county for a declaratory judgment as to whether such information is subject to
protection under subsection (2) of this section.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
3. A new section is added
to chapter 15.58 RCW, to be codified between RCW 15.58.065 and 15.58.070, to
read as follows:

(1) The director may
consult with appropriate public university personnel and federal, state, and
local health agencies concerning unpublished formulas of products acquired by
authorization of this chapter for the purpose of obtaining an independent
assessment of the possible human health risks associated with any proposed
pesticide use by the department.

(2) The director shall
reveal to consulted individuals the confidential statement of formula for the
purpose of assessing the possible human health risks associated with the
proposed pesticide use by the department.

(3) Consulted
individuals shall consider the confidential statement of formula, the proposed
pesticide use, the impact on affected populations, and any other considerations
that may bear on public health in making an assessment of the possible human
health risks.

(4) The
director shall make any independent assessment available to the public except
that the names, chemical abstract service numbers, or other identifying
characteristics or percentages of inert ingredients in a pesticide, nor any
other information marked as confidential by the registrant, shall not be
disclosed. Additionally, any information or documents used in preparation of
an independent assessment that pertain to the confidential statement of formula
and any protected trade secret information shall not be disclosed to the public
by any person.

---
END ---