BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF
WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec.
1. The legislature
recognizes the need for, and the benefits that accrue from, using appointed and
nonelected judicial officers and commissioners to help facilitate the judicial
process and expedite the resolution of disputes. The legislature also recognizes
that elected judicial officers are chosen by the voters and are directly
accountable to the citizens who put them in office. Judicial officers and
commissioners who serve the public should ultimately give the people at large
the opportunity to judge their abilities and competence by running for judicial
office.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
2. A new section is added
to chapter 2.28 RCW to read as follows:

(1) Appointed and
nonelected judicial officers and commissioners serving in the municipal courts,
district courts, and superior courts of this state must run for election in
order to continue to serve as a judicial officer in the courts of this state.

(2) A judicial officer
or commissioner of the municipal, district, or superior courts who is serving
under appointment, rather than by election, must run for election in order to
continue to serve if the judicial officer or commissioner has worked:

(a) More than
twenty-four hours per week for any consecutive twelve-week period;

(b) More than
twenty-four hours per week for eight weeks during any twenty-four week period;

(c) More than two
hundred forty hours during any one-year period.

(3) For
purposes of this section, hours worked during any period of time shall be equal
to the hours the appointed and nonelected judicial officer or commissioner
claimed for purposes of being paid and for which the judicial officer or
commissioner was paid.

---
END ---