BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF
WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec.
1. For the purpose of
providing funds to finance the projects described and authorized by the
legislature in the capital and operating appropriation acts for the 2001-2003
fiscal biennium, and all costs incidental thereto, the state finance committee
is authorized to issue general obligation bonds of the state of Washington in
the sum of nine hundred fifty-six million seven hundred twenty-five thousand
dollars, or as much thereof as may be required, to finance these projects and
all costs incidental thereto. Bonds authorized in this section may be sold at
such price as the state finance committee shall determine. No bonds authorized
in this section may be offered for sale without prior legislative appropriation
of the net proceeds of the sale of the bonds.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
2. The proceeds from the
sale of the bonds authorized in section 1 of this act shall be deposited in the
state building construction account created by RCW 43.83.020. The proceeds
shall be transferred as follows:

(1) Eight hundred four
million dollars to remain in the state building construction account created by
RCW 43.83.020;

(2) Twenty-two million
five hundred thousand dollars to the outdoor recreation account created by RCW
79A.25.060;

(3) Twenty-two million
five hundred thousand dollars to the habitat conservation account created by
RCW 79A.15.020;

(4) Fifty million
dollars to the state taxable building construction account which is hereby
established in the state treasury. All receipts from taxable bond issues are
to be deposited into the account. Moneys in the account may be spent only
after appropriation;

(5) Twenty-nine million
twenty-five thousand dollars to the higher education construction account
created by RCW 28B.140.040.

These proceeds shall be
used exclusively for the purposes specified in this section and for the payment
of expenses incurred in the issuance and sale of the bonds issued for the
purposes of this section, and shall be administered by the office of financial
management subject to legislative appropriation.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
3. (1) The debt-limit
general fund bond retirement account shall be used for the payment of the
principal of and interest on the bonds authorized in section 2 (1), (2), (3),
and (4) of this act.

(2) The state finance
committee shall, on or before June 30th of each year, certify to the state
treasurer the amount needed in the ensuing twelve months to meet the bond
retirement and interest requirements on the bonds authorized in section 2 (1),
(2), (3), and (4) of this act.

(3) On each date on
which any interest or principal and interest payment is due on bonds issued for
the purposes of section 2 (1), (2), (3), and (4) of this act the state
treasurer shall withdraw from any general state revenues received in the state
treasury and deposit in the debt-limit general fund bond retirement account an
amount equal to the amount certified by the state finance committee to be due
on the payment date.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
4. (1) The nondebt-limit
reimbursable bond retirement account shall be used for the payment of the
principal of and interest on the bonds authorized in section 2(5) of this act.

(2) The state finance
committee shall, on or before June 30th of each year, certify to the state
treasurer the amount needed in the ensuing twelve months to meet the bond
retirement and interest requirements on the bonds authorized in section 2(5) of
this act.

(3) On each date on
which any interest or principal and interest payment is due on bonds issued for
the purposes of section 2(5) of this act, the board of regents of the
University of Washington shall cause to be paid out of University of Washington
nonappropriated local funds to the state treasurer for deposit into the
nondebt-limit reimbursement bond retirement account the amount computed in
subsection (2) of this section for bonds issued for the purposes of section
2(5) of this act.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
5. (1) Bonds issued under sections
1 through 4 of this act shall state that they are a general obligation of the
state of Washington, shall pledge the full faith and credit of the state to the
payment of the principal thereof and the interest thereon, and shall contain an
unconditional promise to pay the principal and interest as the same shall
become due.

(2) The owner and
holder of each of the bonds or the trustee for the owner and holder of any of
the bonds may by mandamus or other appropriate proceeding require the transfer
and payment of funds as directed in this section.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
6. The legislature may
provide additional means for raising moneys for the payment of the principal of
and interest on the bonds authorized in section 1 of this act, and sections 2
through 4 of this act shall not be deemed to provide an exclusive method for
the payment.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
7. For the purpose of
providing funds for the planning, design, construction, and other necessary
costs for replacing the waterproof membrane over the east plaza garage and
revising related landscaping, the state finance committee is authorized to
issue general obligation bonds of the state of Washington in the sum of sixteen
million dollars, or as much thereof as may be required, to finance this project
and all costs incidental thereto. Bonds authorized in this section may be sold
at such price as the state finance committee shall determine. No bonds
authorized in this section may be offered for sale without prior legislative
appropriation of the net proceeds of the sale of the bonds.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
8. The proceeds from the
sale of the bonds authorized in section 7 of this act shall be deposited in the
state building construction account created by RCW 43.83.020. The proceeds
shall be transferred as follows: Fifteen million five hundred twenty thousand
dollars to the state vehicle parking account created by RCW 43.01.225.

These proceeds shall be
used exclusively for the purposes specified in this section and for the payment
of expenses incurred in the issuance and sale of the bonds issued for the
purposes of this section, and shall be administered by the office of financial
management subject to legislative appropriation.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
9. (1) The nondebt-limit
reimbursable bond retirement account shall be used for the payment of the principal
of and interest on the bonds authorized in section 8 of this act.

(2) The state finance
committee shall, on or before June 30th of each year, certify to the state
treasurer the amount needed in the ensuing twelve months to meet the bond
retirement and interest requirements on the bonds authorized in section 8 of
this act.

(3) On each date on
which any interest or principal and interest payment is due on bonds issued for
the purposes of section 8 of this act, the state treasurer shall transfer from
the state vehicle parking account for deposit into the nondebt-limit
reimbursable bond retirement account, the amount computed in subsection (2) of
this section for bonds issued for the purposes of section 8 of this act.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
10. (1) Bonds issued under
section 7 of this act shall state that they are a general obligation of the
state of Washington, shall pledge the full faith and credit of the state to the
payment of the principal thereof and the interest thereon, and shall contain an
unconditional promise to pay the principal and interest as the same shall
become due.

(2) The owner and
holder of each of the bonds or the trustee for the owner and holder of any of
the bonds may by mandamus or other appropriate proceeding require the transfer
and payment of funds as directed in this section.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
11. The legislature may
provide additional means for raising moneys for the payment of the principal of
and interest on the bonds authorized in section 7 of this act, and sections 8
and 9 of this act shall not be deemed to provide an exclusive method for the
payment.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
12. The legislature finds
that it is necessary to complete the rehabilitation of the state legislative
building, to extend the useful life of the building, and provide for the
permanent relocation of offices displaced by the rehabilitation and create new
space for public uses.

Furthermore, it is the
intent of the legislature to fund the majority of the rehabilitation and
construction using bonds repaid by the capitol building construction account,
as provided for in the enabling act and dedicated by the federal government for
the sole purpose of establishing a state capitol, to fund the cash elements of
the project using capital project surcharge revenues in the Thurston county
capital facilities account, and to support the establishment of a private
foundation to engage the public in the preservation of the state legislative building
and raise private funds for restoration and educational efforts. The bonds
repaid by the capitol building construction account, whose revenues are from
the sale of capitol building lands, timber, or other materials, shall be exempt
from the state debt limit under RCW 39.42.060, and if at any time the capitol
building construction account has insufficient revenues to repay the bonds, the
legislature may provide additional means for the payment of the bonds, but any
such additional means shall be subject to the state debt limit.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
13. For the purpose of
providing funds for the planning, design, construction, and other necessary
costs for the rehabilitation of the state legislative building, the state finance
committee is authorized to issue general obligation bonds of the state of
Washington in the sum of ninety-seven million three hundred seventy thousand
dollars or as much as may be required to finance the improvements defined in
the legislative building rehabilitation plan and all costs incidental thereto.
Bonds authorized in this section shall not constitute indebtedness for purposes
of the limitations set forth in RCW 39.42.060, to the extent that the bond
payments are paid from the capitol building construction account. Bonds
authorized in this section may be sold at a price the state finance committee
determines. No bonds authorized in this section may be offered for sale
without prior legislative appropriation of the net proceeds of the sale of the
bonds. The proceeds of the sale of the bonds issued for the purposes of this
subsection shall be deposited in the capitol historic district construction
account hereby created in the state treasury.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
14. Ninety-six million four
hundred thousand dollars is appropriated in the 2001-2003 biennium from the
capitol historic district construction account to the department of
general administration for expenses related to the planning, design,
construction, and other necessary costs for the rehabilitation of the state
legislative building construction.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
15. (1) The nondebt-limit
reimbursable bond retirement account must be used for the payment of the
principal and interest on the bonds authorized in section 13 of this act.

(2)(a) The state
finance committee must, on or before June 30th of each year, certify to the
state treasurer the amount needed in the ensuing twelve months to meet the bond
retirement and interest requirements on the bonds authorized in section 13 of
this act.

(b) On or before the
date on which any interest or principal and interest is due, the state
treasurer shall transfer from the capitol building construction account for
deposit into the nondebt-limit reimbursable bond retirement account, the amount
computed in (a) of this subsection for bonds issued for the purposes of section
13 of this act.

(3) If the capitol
building construction account has insufficient revenues to pay the principal
and interest computed in subsection (2)(a) of this section, then the debt-limit
reimbursable bond retirement account must be used for the payment of the principal
and interest on the bonds authorized in section 13 of this act from any
additional means provided by the legislature.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
16. (1) Bonds issued under
section 12 of this act must state that they are a general obligation of the
state of Washington, must pledge the full faith and credit of the state to the
payment of the principal and interest, and must contain an unconditional
promise to pay the principal and interest as it becomes due.

(2) The owner and
holder of each of the bonds or the trustee for the owner and holder of any of
the bonds may by mandamus or other appropriate proceeding require the transfer
and payment of funds as directed in this section.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
17. The legislature may
provide additional means for raising moneys for the payment of the principal
and interest on the bonds authorized in section 12 of this act, and sections 13
through 17 of this act shall not be deemed to provide an exclusive method for
their payment.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
18. The bonds authorized in
sections 1, 7, and 12 of this act shall be a legal investment for all state
funds or funds under state control and for all funds of any other public body.

Sec. 19. RCW 39.42.060 and 1999 c
273 s 9 are each amended to read as follows:

No bonds, notes, or
other evidences of indebtedness for borrowed money shall be issued by the state
which will cause the aggregate debt contracted by the state to exceed that
amount for which payments of principal and interest in any fiscal year would
require the state to expend more than seven percent of the arithmetic mean of
its general state revenues, as defined in section 1(c) of Article VIII of the
Washington state Constitution for the three immediately preceding fiscal years
as certified by the treasurer in accordance with RCW 39.42.070. It shall be
the duty of the state finance committee to compute annually the amount required
to pay principal of and interest on outstanding debt. In making such
computation, the state finance committee shall include all borrowed money
represented by bonds, notes, or other evidences of indebtedness which are
secured by the full faith and credit of the state or are required to be paid,
directly or indirectly, from general state revenues and which are incurred by
the state, any department, authority, public corporation or quasi public
corporation of the state, any state university or college, or any other public
agency created by the state but not by counties, cities, towns, school
districts, or other municipal corporations, and shall include debt incurred
pursuant to section 3 of Article VIII of the Washington state Constitution, but
shall exclude the following:

(1) Obligations for the
payment of current expenses of state government;

(2) Indebtedness
incurred pursuant to RCW 39.42.080 or 39.42.090;

(3) Principal of and
interest on bond anticipation notes;

(4) Any indebtedness
which has been refunded;

(5) Financing contracts
entered into under chapter 39.94 RCW;

(6) Indebtedness
authorized or incurred before July 1, 1993, pursuant to statute which requires
that the state treasury be reimbursed, in the amount of the principal of and
the interest on such indebtedness, from money other than general state revenues
or from the special excise tax imposed pursuant to chapter 67.40 RCW;

(7) Indebtedness
authorized and incurred after July 1, 1993, pursuant to statute that requires
that the state treasury be reimbursed, in the amount of the principal of and
the interest on such indebtedness, from (a) moneys outside the state treasury,
except higher education operating fees, (b) higher education building fees, (c)
indirect costs recovered from federal grants and contracts, and (d) fees and
charges associated with hospitals operated or managed by institutions of higher
education;

(8) Any agreement,
promissory note, or other instrument entered into by the state finance
committee under RCW 39.42.030 in connection with its acquisition of bond
insurance, letters of credit, or other credit support instruments for the
purpose of guaranteeing the payment or enhancing the marketability, or both, of
any state bonds, notes, or other evidence of indebtedness;

(9) Indebtedness
incurred for the purposes identified in RCW 43.99N.020; ((and))

(10) Indebtedness
incurred for the purposes of the school district bond guaranty established by
chapter 39.98 RCW;

(11) Indebtedness
incurred for the purposes of replacing the waterproof membrane over the east plaza
garage and revising related landscaping construction pursuant to section 8 of
this act; and

(12) Indebtedness
incurred for the purposes of the state legislative building rehabilitation, to
the extent that principal and interest payments of such indebtedness are paid
from the capitol building construction account pursuant to section 15(2)(b) of
this act.

To the extent necessary
because of the constitutional or statutory debt limitation, priorities with
respect to the issuance or guaranteeing of bonds, notes, or other evidences of
indebtedness by the state shall be determined by the state finance committee.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
20. Sections 1 through 18 of
this act constitute a new chapter in Title 43 RCW.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
21. If any provision of this
act or its application to any person or circumstance is held invalid, the
remainder of the act or the application of the provision to other persons or
circumstances is not affected.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 22. This act is necessary for
the immediate preservation of the public peace, health, or safety, or support
of the state government and its existing public institutions, and takes effect
immediately.

---
END ---