BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF
WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec.
1. This act may be known and
cited as the Washington athletic trainer's act.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
2. The legislature finds it
necessary to regulate the practice of athletic training at the level of
certification in order to establish professional standards of competence and
conduct that ensures the public health and safety.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
3. The definitions in this
section apply throughout this chapter unless the context clearly requires
otherwise.

(1) "Athletic
injury" means an injury sustained by a person as a result of that person's
participation in sports, games, recreation, exercise, or skill activities
utilizing physical strength, flexibility, agility, range of motion, speed, or
stamina.

(2) "Athletic
trainer" means a person who practices athletic training.

(3) "Athletic
training" means the practice of prevention, recognition, evaluation,
management, disposition, treatment, rehabilitation, physical conditioning, or
physical reconditioning of athletic injuries under the direction of an
authorized health care practitioner and including the use of physical
modalities.

(4) "Authorized
health care practitioner" means physicians, osteopathic physicians,
naturopaths, podiatric physicians and surgeons, dentists, and, in clinical
settings, physical therapists and occupational therapists.

(5)
"Department" means the department of health.

(6) "Physical
modalities" means the use of physical, chemical, electrical, and other
noninvasive modalities including, but not limited to heat, cold, air, light,
water in any of its forms, sound, massage, and therapeutic exercise.

(7)
"Secretary" means the secretary of health or the secretary's
designee.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
4. No person may represent
oneself as a certified athletic trainer nor use any title or description of
services that includes the words certified athletic trainer or training without
applying for certification, meeting the required qualifications specified in
this chapter, and being certified by the department.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
5. (1) The secretary shall
issue a certificate to any applicant who demonstrates to the secretary's
satisfaction that the following requirements have been met:

(a) The applicant is at
least eighteen years of age;

(b) The applicant has
graduated with a baccalaureate or postgraduate degree from an educational
program with an athletic training curriculum recommended by the secretary;

(c) The applicant has
successfully completed an approved examination. The examination must test the
applicant's knowledge of the basic and clinical sciences relative to athletic
training theory and practice, including professional skills and judgment in the
utilization of techniques and methods; and

(d) The applicant has
paid any required fee.

(2) The secretary shall
establish by rule what constitutes adequate proof of meeting the requirements
in subsection (1) of this section.

(3) Applicants are
subject to the grounds for denial of a certificate or issuance of a conditional
certificate under chapter 18.130 RCW.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
6. The secretary shall
establish by rule the standards and procedures for approval of educational
programs in athletic training. The secretary may utilize or contract with
individuals or organizations having expertise in the profession or in education
to assist in the evaluations. The secretary must establish by rule the
standards and procedures for revocation of approval of education programs. The
standards and procedures set must apply equally to educational programs in the
United States and in foreign jurisdictions. The secretary may establish a fee
for educational program evaluations.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
7. (1) The secretary shall
establish the date and location of examinations. Applicants who have been
found by the secretary to meet the other requirements for certification must be
scheduled for the next examination following the filing of the application.
The secretary shall establish by rule the examination application deadline.

(2) The secretary or
the secretary's designees shall examine each applicant, by means determined
most effective, on subjects appropriate to the scope of practice, as
applicable. The examinations must be limited to the purpose of determining
whether the applicant possesses the minimum skill and knowledge necessary to
practice competently.

(3) The examination
papers, all grading of the papers, and the grading of any practical work must
be preserved for a period of not less than one year after the secretary has
made and published the decisions. All examinations must be conducted under
fair and wholly impartial methods.

(4) Any applicant
failing to make the required grade in the first examination may take up to
three subsequent examinations as the applicant desires upon prepaying a fee
determined by the secretary under RCW 43.70.250 for each subsequent
examination. Upon failing four examinations, the secretary may invalidate the
original application and require remedial education before the person may take
future examinations.

(5) The secretary may
approve an examination prepared or administered by a private testing agency or
association of licensing agencies for use by an applicant in meeting the
credentialing requirements.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
8. Applications for credentialing
must be submitted on forms provided by the secretary. The secretary may
require any information and documentation that reasonably relates to the need
to determine whether the applicant meets the criteria for credentialing
provided for in this chapter and chapter 18.130 RCW. Each applicant must pay a
fee determined by the secretary under RCW 43.70.250. The fee must accompany
the application.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
9. The secretary must waive
the examination and credential a person authorized to practice within the state
of Washington if the secretary determines that the person meets commonly
accepted standards of education and experience for the profession. This
section applies only to those individuals who file an application for waiver
within one year of the establishment of the authorized practice.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
10. In addition to any other
authority provided by law, the secretary may:

(1) Adopt rules under
chapter 34.05 RCW necessary to implement this chapter;

(2) Establish all
credentialing, examination, and renewal fees in accordance with RCW 43.70.250;

(3) Establish forms and
procedures necessary to administer this chapter;

(4) Register any
applicants, and issue certificates to applicants who have met the education,
training, and examination requirements for certification and deny a credential
to applicants who do not meet the minimum qualifications, except that
proceedings concerning the denial of certification based upon unprofessional
conduct or impairment shall be governed by the uniform disciplinary act,
chapter 18.130 RCW;

(5) Hire clerical,
administrative, investigative, and other staff as needed to implement this
chapter, and hire individuals certified under this chapter to serve as
examiners for any practical examinations;

(6) Determine minimum
education requirements and evaluate and designate those educational programs
from which graduation will be accepted as proof of eligibility to take a
qualifying examination for applicants for certification;

(7) Prepare, grade, and
administer, or determine the nature of, and supervise the grading and
administration of, examinations for applicants for certification;

(8) Determine whether
alternative methods of training are equivalent to formal education, and
establish forms, procedures, and criteria for evaluation of an applicant's
alternative training to determine the applicant's eligibility to take any
qualifying examination;

(9) Determine which
states have certification requirements equivalent to those of this state, and
issue certification to individuals credentialed in those states without
examinations;

(10) Define and approve
any experience requirement for certification;

(11) Implement and
administer a program for consumer education;

(12) Adopt rules
implementing a continuing competency program;

(13) Maintain the
official department record of all applicants and persons credentialed under
this chapter; and

(14) Establish by rule
the procedures for an appeal of an examination failure.

The secretary must
consult with representative athletic trainer organizations in implementing this
chapter and in the adoption of any rules. The consultation may take the form
of an ad hoc committee.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
11. The secretary must keep
an official record of all proceedings. A part of the record must consist of a
register of all applicants for credentialing under this chapter and the results
of each application.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
12. An applicant holding a
credential in another state may be credentialed to practice in this state
without examination if the secretary determines that the other state's
credentialing standards are substantially equivalent to the standards in this
state.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
13. The secretary must
establish by rule the procedural requirements and fees for renewal of a
credential. Failure to renew invalidates the credential and all privileges
granted by the credential. If a certificate has lapsed for a period longer
than three years, the person must demonstrate competence to the satisfaction of
the secretary by taking continuing education courses, or meeting other
standards determined by the secretary.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
14. The uniform disciplinary
act, chapter 18.130 RCW, governs the issuance and denial of certification,
uncertified and unauthorized practice, and the discipline of persons certified
under this chapter. The secretary is the disciplining authority under this
chapter.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
15. (1) The provisions of
this chapter relating to the regulating of athletic trainers are exclusive. A
governmental subdivision of this state may not enact a law or rule regulating
athletic trainers, except as provided in subsections (2) and (3) of this section.

(2) This section does
not prevent a political subdivision of this state from levying a business fee,
business and occupation tax, or other tax upon athletic trainers, if the fee or
tax is levied by the state on other types of businesses within its boundaries.

(3) This section does
not prevent this state or a political subdivision of this state from regulating
athletic trainers with respect to activities that are not regulated under this
chapter.

Sec. 16. RCW 18.130.040 and 1999
c 335 s 10 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) This chapter
applies only to the secretary and the boards and commissions having
jurisdiction in relation to the professions licensed under the chapters
specified in this section. This chapter does not apply to any business or
profession not licensed under the chapters specified in this section.

(2)(a) The secretary
has authority under this chapter in relation to the following professions:

(i) Dispensing
opticians licensed under chapter 18.34 RCW;

(ii) Naturopaths
licensed under chapter 18.36A RCW;

(iii) Midwives licensed
under chapter 18.50 RCW;

(iv) Ocularists
licensed under chapter 18.55 RCW;

(v) Massage operators
and businesses licensed under chapter 18.108 RCW;

(vi) Dental hygienists
licensed under chapter 18.29 RCW;

(vii) Acupuncturists
licensed under chapter 18.06 RCW;

(viii) Radiologic
technologists certified and X-ray technicians registered under chapter 18.84
RCW;

(ix) Respiratory care
practitioners licensed under chapter 18.89 RCW;

(x) Persons registered
or certified under chapter 18.19 RCW;

(xi) Persons registered
as nursing pool operators under chapter 18.52C RCW;

(xii) Nursing
assistants registered or certified under chapter 18.88A RCW;

(xiii) Health care
assistants certified under chapter 18.135 RCW;

(xiv) Dietitians and
nutritionists certified under chapter 18.138 RCW;

(xv) Chemical
dependency professionals certified under chapter 18.205 RCW;

(xvi) Sex offender
treatment providers certified under chapter 18.155 RCW;

(xvii) Persons licensed
and certified under chapter 18.73 RCW or RCW 18.71.205;

(xviii) Persons
registered as adult family home providers and resident managers under RCW
18.48.020;

(xix) Denturists
licensed under chapter 18.30 RCW;

(xx) Orthotists and
prosthetists licensed under chapter 18.200 RCW; ((and))

(xxi) Surgical
technologists registered under chapter 18.215 RCW; and

(xxii) Athletic
trainers certified under chapter 18.-- RCW (sections 1 through 15 of this act).

(b) The boards and
commissions having authority under this chapter are as follows:

(i) The podiatric
medical board as established in chapter 18.22 RCW;

(ii) The chiropractic
quality assurance commission as established in chapter 18.25 RCW;

(iii) The dental quality
assurance commission as established in chapter 18.32 RCW;

(iv) The board of
hearing and speech as established in chapter 18.35 RCW;

(v) The board of
examiners for nursing home administrators as established in chapter 18.52 RCW;

(vi) The optometry board
as established in chapter 18.54 RCW governing licenses issued under chapter
18.53 RCW;

(vii) The board of
osteopathic medicine and surgery as established in chapter 18.57 RCW governing
licenses issued under chapters 18.57 and 18.57A RCW;

(viii) The board of
pharmacy as established in chapter 18.64 RCW governing licenses issued under
chapters 18.64 and 18.64A RCW;

(ix) The medical
quality assurance commission as established in chapter 18.71 RCW governing
licenses and registrations issued under chapters 18.71 and 18.71A RCW;

(x) The board of
physical therapy as established in chapter 18.74 RCW;

(xi) The board of
occupational therapy practice as established in chapter 18.59 RCW;

(xii) The nursing care
quality assurance commission as established in chapter 18.79 RCW governing
licenses issued under that chapter;

(xiii) The examining
board of psychology and its disciplinary committee as established in chapter
18.83 RCW; and

(xiv) The veterinary
board of governors as established in chapter 18.92 RCW.

(3) In addition to the
authority to discipline license holders, the disciplining authority has the
authority to grant or deny licenses based on the conditions and criteria
established in this chapter and the chapters specified in subsection (2) of
this section. This chapter also governs any investigation, hearing, or
proceeding relating to denial of licensure or issuance of a license
conditioned on the applicant's compliance with an order entered pursuant to RCW
18.130.160 by the disciplining authority.

(4) All disciplining
authorities shall adopt procedures to ensure substantially consistent
application of this chapter, the Uniform Disciplinary Act, among the
disciplining authorities listed in subsection (2) of this section.

Sec. 17. RCW 7.70.020 and 1995 c
323 s 3 are each amended to read as follows:

As used in this chapter
"health care provider" means either:

(1) A person licensed
by this state to provide health care or related services, including, but not
limited to, a licensed acupuncturist, a physician, osteopathic physician,
dentist, nurse, optometrist, podiatric physician and surgeon, chiropractor,
physical therapist, psychologist, pharmacist, optician, physician's assistant,
midwife, osteopathic physician's assistant, nurse practitioner, ((or))
physician's trained mobile intensive care paramedic, or athletic trainer,
including, in the event such person is deceased, his or her estate or personal
representative;

(2) An employee or
agent of a person described in ((part (1) above)) subsection (1) of
this section, acting in the course and scope of his or her
employment, including, in the event such employee or agent is deceased, his or
her estate or personal representative; or

(3) An entity, whether
or not incorporated, facility, or institution employing one or more persons
described in ((part (1) above)) subsection (1) of this section,
including, but not limited to, a hospital, clinic, health maintenance
organization, or nursing home; or an officer, director, employee, or agent
thereof acting in the course and scope of his or her employment, including in
the event such officer, director, employee, or agent is deceased, his or her
estate or personal representative.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
18. Sections 1 through 15 of
this act constitute a new chapter in Title 18 RCW.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 19. If any provision of this
act or its application to any person or circumstance is held invalid, the
remainder of the act or the application of the provision to other persons or
circumstances is not affected.

---
END ---