BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF
WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1. RCW 46.10.040 and 1997 c
241 s 2 are each amended to read as follows:

Application for
registration shall be made to the department in the manner and upon forms the
department prescribes, and shall state the name and address of each owner of
the snowmobile to be registered, and shall be signed by at least one such
owner, and shall be accompanied by an annual registration fee to be established
by the commission, after consultation with the committee and any statewide
snowmobile user groups. ((The fee shall be fifteen dollars pending action
by the commission to increase the fee.)) The commission shall increase the
current fee of twenty dollars by ((two)) five
dollars ((and fifty cents)) effective September 30, ((1996)) 2001,
and the commission shall increase the fee by another ((two)) five
dollars ((and fifty cents)) effective September 30, ((1997)) 2002.
After the fee increase effective September 30, ((1997)) 2002, the
commission shall not increase the fee. Upon receipt of the application and the
application fee, the snowmobile shall be registered and a registration number
assigned, which shall be affixed to the snowmobile in a manner provided in RCW
46.10.070.

The registration
provided in this section shall be valid for a period of one year. At the end
of the period of registration, every owner of a snowmobile in this state shall
renew his or her registration in the manner the department prescribes, for an
additional period of one year, upon payment of the annual registration fee as
determined by the commission.

Any person acquiring a
snowmobile already validly registered under the provisions of this chapter
must, within ten days of the acquisition or purchase of the snowmobile, make
application to the department for transfer of the registration, and the
application shall be accompanied by a transfer fee of one dollar and
twenty-five cents.

A snowmobile owned by a
resident of another state or Canadian province where registration is not
required by law may be issued a nonresident registration permit valid for not
more than sixty days. Application for the permit shall state the name and
address of each owner of the snowmobile to be registered and shall be signed by
at least one owner and shall be accompanied by a registration fee of five
dollars. The registration permit shall be carried on the vehicle at all times
during its operation in this state.

The registration fees
provided in this section shall be in lieu of any personal property or excise
tax heretofore imposed on snowmobiles by this state or any political
subdivision thereof, and no city, county, or other municipality, and no state
agency shall hereafter impose any other registration or license fee on any
snowmobile in this state.

The
department shall make available a pair of uniform decals consistent with the
provisions of RCW 46.10.070. In addition to the registration fee provided in
this section the department shall charge each applicant for registration the
actual cost of the decal. The department shall make available replacement
decals for a fee equivalent to the actual cost of the decals.

--- END ---