BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF
WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec.
1. The legislature is
committed to meeting the needs of a growing population and a healthy economy
statewide; to meeting the needs of fish and healthy watersheds statewide; and
to advancing these two principles together, in increments over time.

The legislature finds
that improved management of the state's water resources, clarifying the
authorities, requirements, and timelines for establishing instream flows,
providing timely decisions on water transfers, clarifying the authority of
water conservancy boards, and enhancing the flexibility of our water management
system to meet both environmental and economic goals are important steps to
providing a better future for our state.

The need for these
improvements is particularly urgent as we are faced with drought conditions.
The failure to act now will only increase the potential negative effects on
both the economy and the environment, including fisheries resources.

Deliberative action
over several legislative sessions and interim periods between sessions will be
required to address the long-term goal of improving the responsiveness of the
state water code to meet the diverse water needs of the state's citizenry. It
is the intent of the legislature to begin this work now by providing tools to
enable the state to respond to imminent drought conditions and other immediate
problems relating to water resources management. It is also the legislature's
intent to lay the groundwork for future legislation for addressing the state's
long-term water problems.

Sec. 2. RCW 90.82.040 and 1998 c
247 s 1 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) Once a WRIA
planning unit has been initiated under RCW 90.82.060 and a lead agency has been
designated, it shall notify the department and may apply to the department for
funding assistance for conducting the planning. Funds shall be provided from
and to the extent of appropriations made by the legislature to the department
expressly for this purpose.

(2)(a) Each planning
unit that has complied with subsection (1) of this section is eligible to
receive watershed planning grants in the following amounts for three phases of
watershed planning:

(((a))) (i)
Initiating governments may apply for an initial organizing grant of up to fifty
thousand dollars for a single WRIA or up to seventy-five thousand dollars for a
multi-WRIA management area in accordance with RCW 90.82.060(4);

(((b))) (ii)(A)
A planning unit may apply for up to two hundred thousand dollars for each WRIA
in the management area for conducting watershed assessments in accordance with
RCW 90.82.070, except that a planning unit that chooses to conduct a
detailed assessment or studies under (a)(ii)(B) of this subsection or whose
initiating governments choose or have chosen to include an instream flow or
water quality component in accordance with RCW 90.82.080 or 90.82.090 may apply
for up to one hundred thousand additional dollars for each instream flow and up
to one hundred thousand additional dollars for each water quality component
included for each WRIA to conduct an assessment on that optional component and
for each WRIA in which the assessments or studies under (a)(ii)(B) of this
subsection are conducted.

(B) A planning unit
may elect to apply for up to one hundred thousand additional dollars to conduct
a detailed assessment of multipurpose water storage opportunities or for
studies of specific multipurpose storage projects which opportunities or
projects are consistent with and support the other elements of the planning
unit's watershed plan developed under this chapter; and

(((c))) (iii)
A planning unit may apply for up to two hundred fifty thousand dollars for each
WRIA in the management area for developing a watershed plan and making
recommendations for actions by local, state, and federal agencies, tribes,
private property owners, private organizations, and individual citizens,
including a recommended list of strategies and projects that would further the
purpose of the plan in accordance with RCW 90.82.060 through 90.82.100.

(b) A planning unit
may request a different amount for phase two or phase three of watershed
planning than is specified in (a) of this subsection, provided that the total
amount of funds awarded do not exceed the maximum amount the planning unit is
eligible for under (a) of this subsection. The department shall approve such
an alternative allocation of funds if the planning unit identifies how the
proposed alternative will meet the goals of this chapter and provides a
proposed timeline for the completion of planning. However, the up to one
hundred thousand additional dollars in funding for instream flow and water
quality components and for water storage assessments or studies that a planning
unit may apply for under (a)(ii)(A) of this subsection may be used only for
those instream flow, water quality, and water storage purposes.

(c) By December 1,
2001, or within one year of initiating phase one of watershed planning,
whichever occurs later, the initiating governments for each planning unit must
inform the department whether they intend to have the planning unit establish
or amend instream flows as part of its planning process. If they elect to have
the planning unit establish or amend instream flows, the planning unit is
eligible to receive one hundred thousand dollars for that purpose in accordance
with (a)(ii) of this subsection. If the initiating governments for a planning
unit elect not to establish or amend instream flows as part of the unit's
planning process, the department shall retain one hundred thousand dollars to
carry out an assessment to support establishment of instream flows and to
establish such flows in accordance with RCW 90.54.020(3)(a) and chapter 90.22
RCW. The department shall not use these funds to amend an existing instream
flow unless requested to do so by the initiating governments for a planning
unit.

(d) In administering
funds appropriated for supplemental funding for optional plan components under
(a)(ii) of this subsection, the department shall give priority in granting the
available funds to proposals for setting or amending instream flows.

(3)(a) The department
shall use the eligibility criteria in this subsection (3) instead of rules,
policies, or guidelines when evaluating grant applications at each stage of the
grants program.

(b) In reviewing grant
applications under this subsection (3), the department shall evaluate whether:

(i) The planning unit
meets all of the requirements of this chapter;

(ii) The application
demonstrates a need for state planning funds to accomplish the objectives of
the planning process; and

(iii) The application
and supporting information evidences a readiness to proceed.

(c) In ranking grant
applications submitted at each stage of the grants program, the department
shall give preference to applications in the following order of priority:

(i) Applications from
existing planning groups that have been in existence for at least one year;

(ii) Applications that
address protection and enhancement of fish habitat in watersheds that have
aquatic fish species listed or proposed to be listed as endangered or
threatened under the federal endangered species act, 16 U.S.C. Sec. 1531 et
seq. and for which there is evidence of an inability to supply adequate water
for population and economic growth from:

(A) First, multi-WRIA
planning; and

(B) Second, single WRIA
planning;

(iii) Applications that
address protection and enhancement of fish habitat in watersheds or for which
there is evidence of an inability to supply adequate water for population and
economic growth from:

(A) First, multi-WRIA
planning; and

(B) Second, single WRIA
planning.

(d) The department may
not impose any local matching fund requirement as a condition for grant
eligibility or as a preference for receiving a grant.

(4) The department may
retain up to one percent of funds allocated under this section to defray
administrative costs.

(5) Planning under this
chapter should be completed as expeditiously as possible, with the focus being
on local stakeholders cooperating to meet local needs.

(6) Funding provided
under this section shall be considered a contractual obligation against the
moneys appropriated for this purpose.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
3. A new section is added
to chapter 90.82 RCW to read as follows:

By October 1, 2001, the
department of ecology shall complete a final nonproject environmental impact
statement that evaluates stream flows to meet the alternative goals of
maintaining, preserving, or enhancing instream resources and the technically
defensible methodologies for determining these stream flows. Planning units
and state agencies assessing and setting or amending instream flows must, as a
minimum, consider the goals and methodologies addressed in the nonproject
environmental impact statement. A planning unit or state agency may assess,
set, or amend instream flows in a manner that varies from the final nonproject
environmental impact statement if consistent with applicable instream flow
laws.

Sec. 4. RCW 90.82.130 and 1998 c
247 s 9 are each amended to read as follows:

(1)(a) Upon completing
its proposed watershed plan, the planning unit may approve the proposal by
consensus of all of the members of the planning unit or by consensus among the
members of the planning unit appointed to represent units of government and a
majority vote of the nongovernmental members of the planning unit.

(b) If the proposal is
approved by the planning unit, the unit shall submit the proposal to the
counties with territory within the management area. If the planning unit has
received funding beyond the initial ((fifty thousand dollars)) organizing
grant under RCW 90.82.040, such a proposal approved by the planning unit
shall be submitted to the counties within four years of the date ((the))
that funds beyond the initial funding ((was)) are first ((received))
drawn upon by the planning unit.

(c) If the watershed
plan is not approved by the planning unit, the planning unit may submit the
components of the plan for which agreement is achieved using the procedure
under (a) of this subsection, or the planning unit may terminate the planning
process.

(2)(a) The legislative
authority of each of the counties with territory in the management area shall
provide public notice of and conduct at least one public hearing on the
proposed watershed plan submitted under this section. After the public hearings,
the legislative authorities of these counties shall convene in joint session to
consider the proposal. The counties may approve or reject the proposed
watershed plan for the management area, but may not amend it. Approval of such
a proposal shall be made by a majority vote of the members of each of the
counties with territory in the management area.

(b) If a proposed
watershed plan is not approved, it shall be returned to the planning unit with
recommendations for revisions. Approval of such a revised proposal by the
planning unit and the counties shall be made in the same manner provided for
the original watershed plan. If approval of the revised plan is not achieved,
the process shall terminate.

(3) The planning unit
shall not add an element to its watershed plan that creates an obligation
unless each of the governments to be obligated has at least one representative
on the planning unit and the respective members appointed to represent those governments
agree to adding the element that creates the obligation. A member's agreeing
to add an element shall be evidenced by a recorded vote of all members of the
planning unit in which the members record support for adding the element. If
the watershed plan is approved under subsections (1) and (2) of this section
and the plan creates obligations: (a) For agencies of state government, the
agencies shall adopt by rule the obligations of both state and county
governments and rules implementing the state obligations, the obligations on
state agencies are binding upon adoption of the obligations into rule, and the
agencies shall take other actions to fulfill their obligations as soon as
possible; or (b) for counties, the obligations are binding on the counties and
the counties shall adopt any necessary implementing ordinances and take other
actions to fulfill their obligations as soon as possible.

(4) As used in this
section, "obligation" means any action required as a result of this
chapter that imposes upon a tribal government, county government, or state
government, either: A fiscal impact; a redeployment of resources; or a change
of existing policy.

Sec. 5. RCW 90.03.380 and 1997 c
442 s 801 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) The right to the
use of water which has been applied to a beneficial use in the state shall be
and remain appurtenant to the land or place upon which the same is used:
PROVIDED, HOWEVER, That the right may be transferred to another or to others and
become appurtenant to any other land or place of use without loss of priority
of right theretofore established if such change can be made without detriment
or injury to existing rights. The point of diversion of water for beneficial
use or the purpose of use may be changed, if such change can be made without
detriment or injury to existing rights. A change in the place of use, point of
diversion, and/or purpose of use of a water right to enable irrigation of
additional acreage or the addition of new uses may be permitted if such change
results in no increase in the annual consumptive quantity of water used under
the water right. For purposes of this section, "annual consumptive
quantity" means the estimated or actual annual amount of water diverted
pursuant to the water right, reduced by the estimated annual amount of return
flows, averaged over the two years of greatest use within the most
recent five-year period of continuous beneficial use of the water right.
Before any transfer of such right to use water or change of the point of
diversion of water or change of purpose of use can be made, any person having
an interest in the transfer or change, shall file a written application
therefor with the department, and the application shall not be granted until
notice of the application is published as provided in RCW 90.03.280. If it
shall appear that such transfer or such change may be made without injury or
detriment to existing rights, the department shall issue to the applicant a
certificate in duplicate granting the right for such transfer or for such
change of point of diversion or of use. The certificate so issued shall be
filed and be made a record with the department and the duplicate certificate
issued to the applicant may be filed with the county auditor in like manner and
with the same effect as provided in the original certificate or permit to
divert water.

(2) If an application
for change proposes to transfer water rights from one irrigation district to
another, the department shall, before publication of notice, receive
concurrence from each of the irrigation districts that such transfer or change
will not adversely affect the ability to deliver water to other landowners or
impair the financial integrity of either of the districts.

(3) A change in place
of use by an individual water user or users of water provided by an irrigation
district need only receive approval for the change from the board of directors
of the district if the use of water continues within the irrigation district,
and when water is provided by an irrigation entity that is a member of a board
of joint control created under chapter 87.80 RCW, approval need only be
received from the board of joint control if the use of water continues within
the area of jurisdiction of the joint board and the change can be made without
detriment or injury to existing rights.

(4) This section shall
not apply to trust water rights acquired by the state through the funding of
water conservation projects under chapter 90.38 RCW or RCW 90.42.010 through
90.42.070.

(5)(a) Pending
applications for new water rights are not entitled to protection from
impairment, injury, or detriment when an application relating to an existing
surface or ground water right is considered.

(b) Applications
relating to existing surface or ground water rights may be processed and
decisions on them rendered independently of processing and rendering decisions
on pending applications for new water rights within the same source of supply
without regard to the date of filing of the pending applications for new water
rights.

(c) Notwithstanding
any other existing authority to process applications, including but not limited
to the authority to process applications under WAC 173-152-050 as it existed on
January 1, 2001, an application relating to an existing surface or ground water
right may be processed ahead of a previously filed application relating to an
existing right when sufficient information for a decision on the previously
filed application is not available and the applicant for the previously filed
application is sent written notice that explains what information is not
available and informs the applicant that processing of the next application
will begin. The previously filed application does not lose its priority date
and if the information is provided by the applicant within sixty days, the
previously filed application shall be processed at that time. This subsection
(5)(c) does not affect any other existing authority to process applications.

(d) Nothing in this
subsection (5) is intended to stop the processing of applications for new water
rights.

(6) No applicant for
a change, transfer, or amendment of a water right may be required to give up
any part of the applicant's valid water right or claim to a state agency, the
trust water rights program, or to other persons as a condition of processing the
application.

(7) In revising the
provisions of this section and adding provisions to this section by this act,
the legislature does not intend to imply legislative approval or disapproval of
any existing administrative policy regarding, or any existing administrative or
judicial interpretation of, the provisions of this section not expressly added
or revised.

Sec. 6. RCW 90.80.005 and 1997 c
441 s 1 are each amended to read as follows:

The legislature finds:

(1) Voluntary water right
transfers ((between water users)) can reallocate water use in a manner
that will result in more efficient use of water resources;

(2) Voluntary water right
transfers can help alleviate water shortages, save capital outlays, reduce
development costs, and provide an incentive for investment in water
conservation efforts by water right holders; and

(3) The state should
expedite the administrative process for ((noncontested)) water right
transfers ((among water right holders, conveying greater operational control
to water managers and water right holders)) by authorizing the
establishment of water conservancy boards.

Sec. 7. RCW 90.80.010 and 1997 c
441 s 2 are each amended to read as follows:

The following
definitions apply throughout this chapter, unless the context clearly requires
otherwise.

(1) "Board"
means a water conservancy board created under this chapter.

(2)
"Commissioner" means a member of a water conservancy board.

(3)
"Department" means the department of ecology.

(4)
"Director" means the director of the department of ecology.

(5) "Record of
decision" means the conclusion reached by a water conservancy board
regarding an application for a transfer filed with the board.

(6)
"Transfer" means a transfer, change, amendment, or other alteration
of a part or all of a water right authorized under RCW 90.03.380, 90.03.390, or
90.44.100.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
8. A new section is added
to chapter 90.80 RCW to read as follows:

(1) If a county is the
only county having lands comprising a water resource inventory area as defined
in chapter 173-500 WAC, the county may elect to establish a water conservancy
board for the water resource inventory area, rather than for the entire county.

(2) Counties having
lands within a water resource inventory area may jointly petition the
department for establishment of a water conservancy board for the water
resource inventory area. Counties may jointly petition the department to
establish boards serving multiple counties or one or more water resource
inventory areas. For any of these multicounty options, the counties must reach
their joint determination on the decision to file the petition, on the
proposed bylaws, and on other matters relating to the establishment and
operation of the board in accordance with the provisions of this chapter and
chapter 39.34 RCW, the interlocal cooperation act. Each county must meet the
requirements of RCW 90.80.020(2). The counties must jointly determine the
sufficiency of a petition under RCW 90.80.020(3) and each county legislative
authority must hold a hearing in its county.

(3) If establishment of
a multicounty water conservancy board under any of the options provided in subsection
(2) of this section is approved by the department, the counties must jointly
appoint the board commissioners and jointly appoint members to fill vacancies
as they occur in accordance with the provisions of this chapter and chapter
39.34 RCW.

(4) A board established
for more than one county or for one or more water resource inventory areas has
the same powers as other boards established under this chapter. The board has
no jurisdiction outside the boundaries of the water resource inventory area or
areas or the county or counties, as applicable, for which it has been
established, except as provided in this chapter.

(5) The counties
establishing a board for a multiple county area must designate a lead county
for purposes of providing a single point of contact for communications with the
department. The lead county shall forward the information required in RCW
90.80.030(1) for each county.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
9. A new section is added
to chapter 90.80 RCW to read as follows:

(1) Except as provided
in subsection (2) of this section, a board shall operate on a countywide basis
or on an areawide basis in the case of a board with jurisdiction in more than
one county or water resource inventory area, and have the following powers, in
addition to any other powers granted in this chapter:

(a) Except as provided
in subsection (2) of this section, a board may act upon applications for the
same kinds of transfers that the department itself is authorized to act upon,
including an application to establish a trust water right under chapter 90.38
or 90.42 RCW. A board may not act upon an application for the type of transfer
within an irrigation district as described in RCW 90.03.380(3). If a board
receives an application for a transfer between two irrigation districts as
described in RCW 90.03.380(2), the board must, before publication of notice of
the application, receive the concurrence specified in that section.

(b) A board may act
upon an application to transfer a water right claim filed under chapter 90.14
RCW. In acting upon such an application, the board must make a tentative
determination as to the validity and extent of the right, if any, embodied in
the claim and may only issue a record of decision regarding a transfer of such
a claim to the extent it is tentatively determined to be valid. Neither the
board's tentative determination, nor the director's acceptance of such a
tentative determination, constitutes an adjudication of the right under RCW
90.03.110 through 90.03.240 or 90.44.220, and such a determination does not
preclude or prejudice a subsequent challenge to the validity, priority, or
quantity of the right in a general adjudication under those sections.

(c) A board may
establish a water right transfer information exchange through which all or part
of a water right may be listed for sale or lease. The board may also accept
and post notices in the exchange from persons interested in acquiring or
leasing water rights from willing sellers.

(d) The director shall
assign a representative of the department to provide technical assistance to
each board. If requested by the board, the representative shall work with the
board as it reviews applications for formal acceptance, prepares draft records
of decision, and considers other technical or legal factors affecting the
board's development of a final record of decision. A board may request and
accept additional technical assistance from the department. A board may also
request and accept assistance and support from the county government or
governments of the county or counties in which it operates.

(2) The jurisdiction of
a board shall not apply within the boundaries of a federal Indian reservation
or to lands held in trust for an Indian band, tribe, or nation by the federal
government.

Sec. 10. RCW 90.80.050 and 1997 c
441 s 6 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) A water
conservancy board constitutes a public body corporate and politic and a
separate unit of local government in the state. Each board shall consist of
three commissioners appointed by the county legislative authority or
authorities as applicable for six-year terms. The county legislative
authority or authorities shall stagger the initial appointment of
commissioners so that the first commissioners who are appointed shall serve
terms of two, four, and six years, respectively, from the date of their
appointment. The county legislative authority or authorities may appoint
two additional commissioners, for a total of five. If the county or counties
elect to appoint five commissioners, the initial terms of the additional
commissioners shall be for three and five-year terms respectively. All
vacancies shall be filled for the unexpired term.

(2) The county
legislative authority or authorities shall consider, but ((is)) are
not limited in appointing, nominations to the board by people or entities
petitioning or requesting the creation of the board. ((However,)) The
county legislative authority or authorities shall ensure that at least
one commissioner is an individual water right holder((s)) who diverts
or withdraws water for use within the ((county are represented on)) area
served by the board. The county legislative authority or authorities
must appoint one person who is not a water right holder. If the county
legislative authority or authorities choose not to appoint five commissioners,
and as of the effective date of this section there is no commissioner on an
existing board who is not a water right holder, the county or counties are not
required to appoint a new commissioner until the first vacancy occurs. In
making appointments to the board, the county legislative authority or
authorities shall choose from among persons who are residents of the county
or counties or a county that is contiguous to the county that the water
conservancy board is to serve.

(3) No
commissioner may participate in a record of decision of a board ((decisions))
until he or she has successfully completed the necessary training required
under RCW 90.80.040. Commissioners shall serve without compensation, but are
entitled to reimbursement for necessary travel expenses in accordance with RCW
43.03.050 and 43.03.060 and costs incident to receiving training.

Sec. 11. RCW 90.80.070 and 1997 c
441 s 9 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) A person
proposing a transfer of a water right may elect to file an application with a
water conservancy board, if a board has been established for the geographic
area where the water is or would be diverted, withdrawn, or used. If the
person has already filed an application with the department, the person may
request that the department convey the application to the conservancy board
with jurisdiction and the department must promptly forward the application. A
board is not required to process an application filed with the board. If a
board decides that it will not process an application, it must return the
application to the applicant and must inform the applicant that the application
may be filed with the department. An application((s)) to the board
for a transfer((s)) shall be made on a form provided by the
department((, and shall contain such)). A board may require an
applicant to submit within a reasonable time additional information as may
be required by the board in order to review and act upon the application. At a
minimum, the application shall include information sufficient to establish to
the board's satisfaction ((of the transferor's)) that a right to
the quantity of water being transferred exists, and a description of any
applicable limitations on the right to use water, including the point of
diversion or withdrawal, place of use, source of supply, purpose of use,
quantity of use permitted, time of use, period of use, and the place of
storage.

(2) The ((transferor
and the transferee of)) applicant for any proposed water right
transfer may apply to a board for ((approval of the)) a record of
decision on a transfer if the water proposed to be transferred is currently
diverted, withdrawn, or used within the geographic ((boundaries of
the county)) area in which the board has jurisdiction, or would be
diverted, withdrawn, or used within the geographic ((boundaries of
the county)) area in which the board has jurisdiction if the
transfer is approved. In the case of a proposed water right transfer in
which the water is currently diverted or withdrawn or would be diverted or
withdrawn outside the geographic boundaries of the county or the water
resource inventory area where the use is proposed to be made, the board
shall hold a public hearing in the county of the diversion or withdrawal
or proposed diversion or withdrawal. The board shall provide for
prominent publication of notice of ((such)) the hearing in a
newspaper of general circulation published in the county in which the hearing
is to be held for the purpose of affording an opportunity for interested
persons to comment upon the application. If an application is for a
transfer of water out of the water resource inventory area that is the source
of the water, the board shall consult with the department regarding the
application.

(3) After an
application for a transfer is filed with the board, the board shall publish
notice of the application ((in accordance with the publication requirements))
and send notice to state agencies ((as provided in)) in accordance
with the requirements of RCW 90.03.280. In addition, the board shall
send notice of the application to any Indian tribe with reservation lands that
would be, but for section 9(2) of this act, within the area in which the board
has jurisdiction. The board shall also provide notice of the application to
any Indian tribe that has requested that it be notified of applications.
Any person may submit comments and other information to the board
regarding the application. ((Any water right holder claiming detriment or
injury to an existing water right may intervene in the application before the
board pursuant to subsection (4) of this section. If a majority of the board
determines that the application is complete, in accordance with the law and the
transfer can be made without injury or detriment to existing water rights in
accordance with RCW 90.03.380, the board shall issue the applicant a
certificate conditionally approving the transfer, subject to review by the
director.

(4) If a water right
holder claims a proposed transfer will cause an impairment to that right, the
water right holder is entitled to a hearing before the board. The board shall
receive such evidence as it deems material and necessary to determine the
validity of the claim of impairment. If the party claiming the impairment
establishes by a preponderance of the evidence that his or her water right will
be impaired by the proposed transfer, the board may not approve the transfer
unless the applicant and the impaired party agree upon compensation for the
impairment.)) The comments
and information may be submitted in writing or verbally at any public meeting
of the board to discuss or decide on the application. The comments must be
considered by the board in making its record of decision.

(4) If a majority of
the board determines that the application is complete, and that the transfer is
in accordance with RCW 90.03.380, 90.03.390, or 90.44.100, the board must issue
a record of decision approving the transfer, subject to review by the
director. In making its record of decision, the board must consider among
other things whether the proposed transfer can be made without detriment or
injury to existing water rights, including rights established for instream
flows. The board must include in its record of decision any conditions that
are deemed necessary for the transfer to qualify for approval under the
applicable laws of the state. The basis for the record of decision of the
board must be documented in a report of examination. The board's proposed
approval must clearly state that the applicant is not permitted to proceed to
effect the proposed transfer until a final decision is made by the director. In
making its record of decision, the board must consider among other things
whether the proposed transfer can be made without detriment or injury to
existing water rights, including rights established for instream flows.

(5) If a majority of
the board determines that the application cannot be approved under the
applicable laws of the state of Washington, the board must make a record of
decision denying the application together with its report of examination
documenting its record of decision. The board's record of decision is subject
to review by the director under RCW 90.80.080.

Sec. 12. RCW 90.80.080 and 1997 c
441 s 11 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) ((If a transfer
is approved by the board,)) The board must provide a copy of its record
of decision to the applicant. The board shall submit ((a copy of the
proposed certificate conditionally approving)) its record of decision on
the transfer application to the department for review. The board shall
also submit ((a)) its report of examination to the department
summarizing ((any)) factual findings on which the board relied in ((deciding
to approve the proposed transfer)) reaching its record of decision and a
copy of the files and records upon which the board's record of decision is
based. The board shall also promptly transmit notice by mail to any
person who objected to the transfer or who requested notice of the board's
record of decision.

(2) Upon receipt of
a board's record of decision, the department shall promptly post the text of
the record of decision transmittal form on the department's internet site.
The director shall review each ((proposed transfer conditionally approved))
record of decision made by a board for compliance with applicable
state water ((transfer laws including RCW 90.03.380, 90.03.390, and
90.44.100, rules and guidelines adopted by the department, and other applicable))
law.

(3) Any party to a
transfer ((or a)), third party who alleges his or her water right
will be impaired by the proposed transfer, or other person may file ((objections))
a letter of concern or support with the department and the department
may consider the concern or support expressed in the letter. ((If
objections to the transfer are filed with the department, the board shall
forward the files and records upon which it based its decision to the
department.)) Such letters must be received by the department within
thirty days of the department's receipt of the board's record of decision.

(4) The director shall
review the ((action)) record of decision of the board and shall
affirm, reverse, or modify the action of the board within forty-five days of
receipt. The forty-five day time period may be extended for an additional
thirty days by the director((, upon the consent of the parties to the
transfer)) or at the request of the board or applicant. If the
director fails to act within ((this)) the prescribed time period,
the board's ((action is final. Upon approval of a water transfer by the
action or nonaction of the director, the conditional certificate issued by the
board is final and valid)) record of decision becomes the decision of
the department and is appealable as provided by RCW 90.80.090. If the director
acts within the prescribed time period, the director's decision to affirm,
modify, or reverse is appealable as provided by RCW 90.80.090, and the
director's decision to remand is appealable as provided by RCW 90.80.120(2)(b).

Sec. 13. RCW 90.80.090 and 1997 c
441 s 12 are each amended to read as follows:

The decision of the
director to approve or deny an action to create a board, or to approve,
deny, or modify a water right transfer either by action or ((nonaction
shall be)) inaction is appealable in the same manner as other water
right decisions made pursuant to chapters 90.03 and 90.44 RCW.

Sec. 14. RCW 90.80.100 and 1997 c
441 s 13 are each amended to read as follows:

Neither the county ((nor))
or counties, the department, a conservancy board, or its employees,
nor individual conservancy board commissioners shall be subject to any
cause of action or claim for damages arising out of records of decisions on
transfers ((approved)) made by a board under this chapter.

Sec. 15. RCW 90.80.120 and 1997 c
441 s 16 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) A commissioner of a
water conservancy board ((who has an ownership interest in a water right
subject to an application for approval of a transfer or change by the board,
shall not participate in the board's review or decision upon the application))
shall not engage in any act which is in conflict with the proper discharge
of the official duties of a commissioner. A commissioner is deemed to have a
conflict of interest if he or she:

(a) Has an ownership
interest in a water right subject to an application for approval before the
board;

(b) Receives or has
a financial interest in an application submitted to the board or a project,
development, or venture related to the approval of the application; or

(c) Solicits,
accepts, or seeks anything of economic value as a gift, gratuity, or favor from
any person, firm, or corporation involved in the application.

(2) ((A commissioner
of a water conservancy board who also serves as an employee or upon the
governing body of a municipally owned water system, shall not participate in
the board's review or decision upon an application for the transfer or change
of a water right in which that water system has or is proposed to have an
ownership interest.)) The department shall return a record of decision
to a conservancy board without action where the department determines that any
member of a board has violated subsection (1) of this section.

(a) If a person
seeking to rely on this section to disqualify a commissioner knows of the basis
for disqualification before the time the board issues a record of decision, the
person must request the board to have the commissioner recuse himself or
herself from further involvement in processing the application, or be barred
from later raising that challenge.

(b) If the
commissioner does not recuse himself or herself or if the person becomes aware
of the basis for disqualification after the board issues a record of decision
but within the time period under RCW 90.80.080(3) for filing objections with
the department, the person must raise the challenge with the department. If
the department determines that the commissioner should be disqualified under
this section, the director must remand the record of decision to the board for
reconsideration and resubmission of a record of decision. The disqualified
commissioner shall not participate in any further board review of the
application. The department's decision on whether to remand a record of
decision under this section may only be appealed at the same time and in the
same manner as an appeal of the department's decision to affirm, modify, or
reverse the record of decision after remand.

(c) If the person
becomes aware of the basis for disqualification after the time for filing
objections with the department, the person may raise the challenge in an appeal
of the department's final decision under RCW 90.80.090.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
16. A new section is added
to chapter 90.80 RCW to read as follows:

A water conservancy
board may be formally dissolved by the county or jointly by the counties as
applicable in which it operates by adoption of a resolution of the county
legislative authority or authorities. Notice of the dissolution must be
provided to the director. The department may petition the county legislative
authority of the county or the lead county for a board to request that the
board be dissolved for repeated statutory violations or demonstrated inability
to perform the functions for which the board was created.

Sec. 17. RCW 90.80.130 and 1997 c
441 s 17 are each amended to read as follows:

Water conservancy board
activities are subject to the open public meetings act, chapter 42.30 RCW and
to chapter 42.32 RCW. This includes announcing meetings in advance.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
18. A new section is added
to chapter 90.80 RCW to read as follows:

(1) A board is subject
to the requirements of chapter 42.17 RCW. Each board must establish and
maintain records of its proceedings and determinations. While in the
possession of the board, all such records must be made available for inspection
and copies must be provided to the public on request under the provisions of
chapter 42.17 RCW.

(2) Upon the conclusion
of its business involving a water right transfer application, a board must
promptly send the original copies of all records relating to that application
to the department for recordkeeping. A board may keep a copy of the original
documents. After the records are transferred to the department, the
responsibility for making the records available under chapter 42.17 RCW is
transferred to the department.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
19. A new section is added
to chapter 90.80 RCW to read as follows:

For purposes of
carrying out the official business of a board, a quorum consists of the
physical presence of two of the three members of a three-member board or three
of the five members of a five-member board. A board may operate with one or
two vacant positions as long as it meets the quorum requirement.

Sec. 20. RCW 90.80.140 and 1997 c
441 s 18 are each amended to read as follows:

Nothing in this chapter
affects transfers that may be otherwise approved under chapter 90.03 or
90.44 RCW.

Sec. 21. RCW 90.80.150 and 1997 c
441 s 19 are each amended to read as follows:

The department shall
report biennially by December 31st of each even-numbered year to the
appropriate committees of the legislature on the boards formed or sought to be
formed under the authority of this chapter, the transfer applications reviewed
and other activities conducted by the boards, and the funding of such boards. Conservancy
boards must provide information regarding their activities to the department to
assist the department in preparing the report.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
22. It is the intent of the
legislature to help preserve the agricultural economy of the state by allowing
changes of family farm water permits from agricultural irrigation to other
agricultural purposes. Within the urbanizing areas of the state, the legislature
recognizes the need to allow water from family farms to be converted to other
purposes as the use of the land changes consistent with adopted land use
plans. The legislature also intends to allow farmers to benefit from water
conservation projects and from temporary leases of their family farm water
permits. Water conservation and water leases will also allow farmers to
contribute to instream flows and other purposes. However, outside of
urbanizing areas, the legislature intends to preserve farmlands by ensuring
that the quantity of water needed to grow the crops historically grown remains
with the farm. In addition, to help retain family farms within the state, the
legislature intends to allow family farms of a large enough size to be economically
viable under modern agricultural market conditions.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
23. A new section is added
to chapter 90.66 RCW to read as follows:

(1) Transfers of water
rights established as family farm permits under this chapter may be approved as
authorized under this section and under RCW 90.03.380, 90.03.390, or 90.44.100
or chapter 90.80 RCW as appropriate.

(2) A family farm
permit may be transferred:

(a) For use for
agricultural irrigation purposes as limited by RCW 90.66.060 (1) and (2);

(b) To any purpose of
use that is a beneficial use of water if the transfer is made exclusively under
a lease agreement, except that transfers for the use of water for agricultural
irrigation purposes shall be limited as provided by RCW 90.66.060 (1) and (2);

(c) To any purpose of
use that is a beneficial use of water if the water right is for the use of
water at a location that is, at the time the transfer is approved, within the
boundaries of an urban growth area designated under chapter 36.70A RCW or, in
counties not planning under chapter 36.70A RCW, within a city or town or within
areas designated for urban growth in comprehensive plans prepared under chapter
36.70 RCW, except that transfers for the use of water for agricultural
irrigation purposes shall be limited as provided by RCW 90.66.060 (1) and (2).

(3) If a portion of the
water governed by a water right established under the authority of a family
farm permit is made surplus to the beneficial uses exercised under the right
through the implementation of practices or technologies, including but not
limited to conveyance practices or technologies, that are more water-use
efficient than those under which the right was perfected, the right to use the
surplus water may be transferred to any purpose of use that is a beneficial use
of water. Nothing in this subsection authorizes: A transfer of the portion of
a water right that is necessary for the production of crops historically grown
under the right; or a transfer of a water right or a portion of a water right
that has not been perfected through beneficial use before the transfer. Water
right transfers approved under this subsection must be consistent with the
provisions of RCW 90.03.380(1).

(4) Before a change in
purpose of a family farm water permit to municipal supply purpose or domestic
purpose may be authorized, the public water system that is receiving the family
farm water permit must be meeting the water conservation requirements of its
current water system plan approved by the department of health or its small
water system management program.

(5) The place of use
for a water right transferred under the authority of this section shall remain
within: The water resource inventory area containing the place of use for the
water right before the transfer; or the urban growth area or contiguous urban
growth areas of the place of use for the water right before the transfer if the
urban growth area or contiguous urban growth areas cross boundaries of water
resource inventory areas.

(6) The authority
granted by this section to transfer or alter the purpose of use of a water
right established under the authority of a family farm permit shall not be
construed as limiting in any manner the authority granted by RCW 90.03.380,
90.03.390, or 90.44.100 to alter other elements of such a water right.

Sec. 24. RCW 90.66.040 and 1979 c
3 s 4 are each amended to read as follows:

For the purposes of
this chapter, the following definitions shall be applicable:

(1) "Family
farm" means a geographic area including not more than ((two)) six
thousand acres of irrigated agricultural lands, whether contiguous or
noncontiguous, the controlling interest in which is held by a person having a
controlling interest in no more than ((two)) six thousand acres
of irrigated agricultural lands in the state of Washington which are irrigated
under rights acquired after December 8, 1977.

(2) "Person"
means any individual, corporation, partnership, limited partnership,
organization, or other entity whatsoever, whether public or private. The term
"person" shall include as one person all corporate or partnership
entities with a common ownership of more than one-half of the assets of each of
any number of such entities.

(3) "Controlling
interest" means a property interest that can be transferred to another
person, the percentage interest so transferred being sufficient to effect a
change in control of the landlord's rights and benefits. Ownership of property
held in trust shall not be deemed a controlling interest where no part of the
trust has been established through expenditure or assignment of assets of the
beneficiary of the trust and where the rights of the family farm permit which
is a part of the trust cannot be transferred to another by the beneficiary of
the trust under terms of the trust. Each trust of a separate donor origin
shall be treated as a separate entity and the administration of property under
trust shall not represent a controlling interest on the part of the trust
officer.

(4)
"Department" means the department of ecology of the state of
Washington.

(5)
"Application", "permit" and "public waters" shall
have the meanings attributed to these terms in chapters 90.03 and 90.44 RCW.

(6) "Public water
entity" means any public or governmental entity with authority to
administer and operate a system to supply water for irrigation of agricultural
lands.

(7)
"Transfer" means a transfer, change, or amendment to part or all of a
water right authorized under RCW 90.03.380, 90.03.390, or 90.44.100 or chapter
90.80 RCW.

(8)
"Withdraw" means to withdraw ground water or to divert surface water.

Sec. 25. RCW 90.66.060 and 1979 c
3 s 6 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) Except as
provided in subsections (2) and (3) of this section, the right to withdraw
water for use for the irrigation of agricultural lands under authority of a
family farm permit shall have no time limit ((but)) and shall be
conditioned upon the land being irrigated complying with the definition of a
family farm as defined at the time the permit is issued((: PROVIDED,
HOWEVER, That)).

(2) If the
acquisition by any person of land and water rights by gift, devise, bequest, or
by way of bona fide satisfaction of a debt, would otherwise cause land being
irrigated pursuant to a family farm permit to lose its status as a family farm,
such acquisition shall be deemed to have no effect upon the status of family
farm water permits pertaining to land held or acquired by the person acquiring
such land and water rights if all lands held or acquired are again in
compliance with the definition of a family farm within five years from the date
of such acquisition.

(((2))) (3)
For family farm permits under this chapter, if the department determines
that water is being withdrawn ((under a family farm permit)) for use on
land not in conformity with the definition of a family farm, the department
shall notify the holder of such family farm permit by personal service of such
fact and the permit shall be suspended two years from the date of receipt of
notice unless the person having a controlling interest in said land satisfies
the department that such land is again in conformity with the definition of a
family farm. The department may, upon a showing of good cause and reasonable
effort to attain compliance on the part of the person having the controlling
interest in such land, extend the two year period prior to suspension. If
conformity is not achieved prior to five years from the date of notice the
rights of withdrawal shall be canceled.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
26. A new section is added
to chapter 82.16 RCW to read as follows:

(1) The legislature
intends to provide an incentive for water distribution businesses to help
reduce their customers' use of water through measures such as: Water
conservation and outreach programs, distributing shower flow restrictors,
toilet tank water displacement devices, and leak detection dye tablets;
providing water-efficient fixtures at no cost, giving a rebate for
customer-purchased fixtures, or arranging for suppliers to provide fixtures at
a reduced price; providing plants for low-water demand landscaping, moisture
sensors, flow timers, low-volume sprinklers, and drip irrigation systems; and
using conservation pricing and billings that show percentage increase/decrease
in water use over the same period from the previous year.

(2) In computing tax
under this chapter, there shall be deducted from the gross income seventy-five
percent of those amounts expended to improve consumers' efficiency of water use
or to otherwise reduce the use of water by the consumer when the expenditures
are implementing elements of the conservation plan within a state approved
water system plan or a small water system management program. Total deductions
taken under this subsection and the resulting tax savings shall be reported to
the department of revenue at the time the tax is due.

(3) This chapter does
not apply to seventy-five percent of the amounts received for water services
supplied by an entity that holds a permit under RCW 90.46.030 when the water
supplied is reclaimed water as defined in RCW 90.46.010. Total deductions
taken under this subsection and the resulting tax savings shall be reported to
the department of revenue at the time the tax is due.

(4)(a) There is created
in the state general fund the state water rights trust account. Moneys in the
account may be spent only after appropriation. Expenditures from the account
may be used by the department of ecology, in consultation with the department
of fish and wildlife, only to purchase or lease water rights to augment
instream flows in streams supporting fish stocks that are listed as threatened
or endangered under federal law or listed as depressed or threatened by reason
of inadequate stream flows under state law.

(b) The legislature intends
that an amount equal to one-third of the total tax savings resulting from this
section in each state fiscal year shall be appropriated from the general fund‑-state
to the state water rights trust account. The department of revenue shall
calculate the total amount of tax savings reported by water suppliers under
this section and shall report this amount to the office of financial management
and the appropriate committees of the legislature by October 1st of each
calendar year.

(5) This section expires
June 30, 2003.

Sec. 27. RCW 90.14.140 and 1998 c
258 s 1 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) For the purposes of
RCW 90.14.130 through 90.14.180, "sufficient cause" shall be defined
as the nonuse of all or a portion of the water by the owner of a water right
for a period of five or more consecutive years where such nonuse occurs as a
result of:

(a) Drought, or other
unavailability of water;

(b) Active service in
the armed forces of the United States during military crisis;

(c) Nonvoluntary
service in the armed forces of the United States;

(d) The operation of
legal proceedings;

(e) Federal or state
agency leases of or options to purchase lands or water rights which preclude or
reduce the use of the right by the owner of the water right;

(f) Federal laws
imposing land or water use restrictions either directly or through the
voluntary enrollment of a landowner in a federal program implementing those
laws, or acreage limitations, or production quotas.

(2) Notwithstanding any
other provisions of RCW 90.14.130 through 90.14.180, there shall be no
relinquishment of any water right:

(a) If such right is
claimed for power development purposes under chapter 90.16 RCW and annual
license fees are paid in accordance with chapter 90.16 RCW;

(b) If such right is
used for a standby or reserve water supply to be used in time of drought or
other low flow period so long as withdrawal or diversion facilities are
maintained in good operating condition for the use of such reserve or standby
water supply;

(c) If such right is
claimed for a determined future development to take place either within fifteen
years of July 1, 1967, or the most recent beneficial use of the water right,
whichever date is later;

(d) If such right is
claimed for municipal water supply purposes under chapter 90.03 RCW;

(e) If such waters are
not subject to appropriation under the applicable provisions of RCW 90.40.030;
((or))

(f) If such right or
portion of the right is leased to another person for use on land other than the
land to which the right is appurtenant as long as the lessee makes beneficial
use of the right in accordance with this chapter and a transfer or change of
the right has been approved by the department in accordance with RCW 90.03.380,
90.03.383, 90.03.390, or 90.44.100; or

(g) If such right is
a trust water right under chapter 90.38 or 90.42 RCW.

(3) In adding
provisions to this section by this act, the legislature does not intend to
imply legislative approval or disapproval of any existing administrative policy
regarding, or any existing administrative or judicial interpretation of, the
provisions of this section not expressly added or revised.

Sec. 28. RCW 90.38.020 and 1989 c
429 s 3 are each amended to read as follows:

(1)(a) The
department may acquire water rights, including but not limited to storage
rights, by purchase, lease, gift, or other appropriate means other than
by condemnation, from any person or entity or combination of persons or
entities. Once acquired, such rights are trust water rights. A water right
acquired by the state that is expressly conditioned to limit its use to
instream purposes shall be administered as a trust water right in compliance
with that condition.

(b) If an aquatic
species is listed as threatened or endangered under federal law for a body of
water, or is listed as depressed or threatened by reason of inadequate stream
flows under state law, and the holder of a right to water from the body of
water chooses to donate all or a portion of the person's water right to the
trust water system to assist in providing those instream flows on a temporary
or permanent basis, the department shall accept the donation on such terms as
the person may prescribe as long as the donation satisfies the requirements of
subsection (4) of this section and the other applicable requirements of this
chapter and the terms prescribed are relevant and material to protecting any
interest in the water right retained by the donor. Once accepted, such rights
are trust water rights within the conditions prescribed by the donor.

(2) The department may
make such other arrangements, including entry into contracts with other persons
or entities as appropriate to ensure that trust water rights acquired in
accordance with this chapter can be exercised to the fullest possible extent.

(3) The trust water
rights may be acquired on a temporary or permanent basis.

(4) A water right
donated under subsection (1)(b) of this section shall not exceed the extent to
which the water right was exercised during the five years before the donation
nor may the total of any portion of the water right remaining with the donor
plus the donated portion of the water right exceed the extent to which the
water right was exercised during the five years before the donation. A water
right holder who believes his or her water right has been impaired by a trust
water right donated under subsection (1)(b) of this section may request that
the department review the impairment claim. If the department determines that
exercising the trust water right resulting from the donation or exercising a
portion of that trust water right donated under subsection (1)(b) of this
section is impairing existing water rights in violation of RCW 90.38.902, the
trust water right shall be altered by the department to eliminate the
impairment. Any decision of the department to alter or not alter a trust water
right donated under subsection (1)(b) of this section is appealable to the
pollution control hearings board under RCW 43.21B.230. A donated water right's
status as a trust water right under this subsection is not evidence of the
validity or quantity of the water right.

(5) Any water right
conveyed to the trust water right system as a gift that is expressly
conditioned to limit its use to instream purposes shall be managed by the
department for public purposes to ensure that it qualifies as a gift that is
deductible for federal income taxation purposes for the person or entity conveying
the water right.

(6) If the
department acquires a trust water right by lease in an area in which a drought
order has been issued under RCW 43.83B.405 and is in effect at the time the
department leases the water right, the amount of the trust water right shall
not exceed the extent to which the water right was exercised during the five
years before the acquisition was made nor may the total of any portion of the
water right remaining with the original water right holder plus the portion of
the water right leased by the department exceed the extent to which the water
right was exercised during the five years before the acquisition. A water
right holder who believes his or her water right has been impaired by a trust
water right leased under this subsection may request that the department review
the impairment claim. If the department determines that exercising the trust
water right resulting from the leasing or exercising a portion of that trust
water right leased under this subsection is impairing existing water rights in
violation of RCW 90.38.902, the trust water right shall be altered by the
department to eliminate the impairment. Any decision of the department to
alter or not to alter a trust water right leased under this subsection is
appealable to the pollution control hearings board under RCW 43.21B.230. The
department's leasing of a trust water right under this subsection is not
evidence of the validity or quantity of the water right.

(7) For a water
right donated to or acquired by the trust water rights program on a temporary
basis, the full quantity of water diverted or withdrawn to exercise the right
before the donation or acquisition shall be placed in the trust water rights
program and shall revert to the donor or person from whom it was acquired when
the trust period ends.

Sec. 29. RCW 90.38.040 and 1994 c
264 s 90 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) All trust water
rights acquired by the department shall be placed in the Yakima river basin
trust water rights program to be managed by the department. The department
shall issue a water right certificate in the name of the state of Washington
for each trust water right it acquires.

(2) Trust water rights
shall retain the same priority date as the water right from which they
originated. Trust water rights may be modified as to purpose or place of use
or point of diversion, including modification from a diversionary use to a
nondiversionary instream use.

(3) Trust water rights
may be held by the department for instream flows ((and/or)),
irrigation use, or other beneficial use. Trust water rights may be acquired
on a temporary or permanent basis. To the extent practicable and subject to
legislative appropriation, trust water rights acquired in an area with an
approved watershed plan developed under chapter 90.82 RCW shall be consistent
with that plan if the plan calls for such acquisition.

(4) A schedule of the
amount of net water saved as a result of water conservation projects carried
out in accordance with this chapter, shall be developed annually to reflect the
predicted hydrologic and water supply conditions, as well as anticipated water
demands, for the upcoming irrigation season. This schedule shall serve as the
basis for the distribution and management of trust water rights each year.

(5)(a) No
exercise of a trust water right may be authorized unless the department first
determines that no existing water rights, junior or senior in priority, will be
impaired as to their exercise or injured in any manner whatever by such
authorization.

(b) Before any
trust water right is exercised, the department shall publish notice thereof in
a newspaper of general circulation published in the county or counties in which
the storage, diversion, and use are to be made, and in such other newspapers as
the department determines are necessary, once a week for two consecutive
weeks. At the same time the department may also send notice thereof containing
pertinent information to the director of fish and wildlife.

(c) Subsections (4)
and (5)(b) of this section do not apply to a trust water right resulting from a
donation for instream flows described in RCW 90.38.020(1)(b) or from the lease
of a water right under RCW 90.38.020(6) if the period of the lease does not exceed
five years. However, the department shall provide the notice described in (b)
of this subsection the first time the trust water right resulting from the
donation is exercised.

(6) RCW 90.03.380 and
90.14.140 through 90.14.910 shall have no applicability to trust water rights
held by the department under this chapter or exercised under this section.

Sec. 30. RCW 90.42.040 and 1993 c
98 s 3 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) All trust water
rights acquired by the state shall be placed in the state trust water rights
program to be managed by the department. Trust water rights acquired by the
state shall be held or authorized for use by the department for instream flows,
irrigation, municipal, or other beneficial uses consistent with applicable
regional plans for pilot planning areas, or to resolve critical water supply
problems. To the extent practicable and subject to legislative
appropriation, trust water rights acquired in an area with an approved
watershed plan developed under chapter 90.82 RCW shall be consistent with that
plan if the plan calls for such acquisition.

(2) The department
shall issue a water right certificate in the name of the state of Washington
for each permanent trust water right conveyed to the state indicating the reach
or reaches of the stream, the quantity, and the use or uses to which it may be
applied. A superseding certificate shall be issued that specifies the amount
of water the water right holder would continue to be entitled to as a result of
the water conservation project. The superseding certificate shall retain the
same priority date as the original right. For nonpermanent conveyances, the
department shall issue certificates or such other instruments as are necessary
to reflect the changes in purpose or place of use or point of diversion or
withdrawal. ((Water rights for which such nonpermanent conveyances are
arranged shall not be subject to relinquishment for nonuse.))

(3) A trust water right
retains the same priority date as the water right from which it originated, but
as between them the trust right shall be deemed to be inferior in priority
unless otherwise specified by an agreement between the state and the party
holding the original right.

(4) Exercise of a trust
water right may be authorized only if the department first determines that
neither water rights existing at the time the trust water right is established,
nor the public interest will be impaired. If impairment becomes apparent
during the time a trust water right is being exercised, the department shall
cease or modify the use of the trust water right to eliminate the impairment.

(5) Before any trust
water right is created or modified, the department shall, at a minimum, require
that a notice be published in a newspaper of general circulation published in
the county or counties in which the storage, diversion, and use are to be made,
and in other newspapers as the department determines is necessary, once a week
for two consecutive weeks. At the same time the department shall send a notice
containing pertinent information to all appropriate state agencies, potentially
affected local governments and federally recognized tribal governments, and
other interested parties.

(6) RCW 90.14.140
through 90.14.230 have no applicability to trust water rights held by the
department under this chapter or exercised under this section.

(7) RCW 90.03.380 has
no applicability to trust water rights acquired by the state through the funding
of water conservation projects.

(8) Subsections (4)
and (5) of this section do not apply to a trust water right resulting from a
donation for instream flows described in RCW 90.42.080(1)(b) or to a trust
water right leased under RCW 90.42.080(8) if the period of the lease does not
exceed five years. However, the department shall provide the notice described
in subsection (5) of this section the first time the trust water right
resulting from the donation is exercised.

Sec. 31. RCW 90.42.080 and 1993 c
98 s 4 are each amended to read as follows:

(1)(a) The state
may acquire all or portions of existing water rights, by purchase, gift, or
other appropriate means other than by condemnation, from any person or entity
or combination of persons or entities. Once acquired, such rights are trust
water rights. A water right acquired by the state that is expressly
conditioned to limit its use to instream purposes shall be administered as a
trust water right in compliance with that condition.

(b) If an aquatic
species is listed as threatened or endangered under federal law for a body of
water, or is listed as depressed or threatened by reason of inadequate stream
flow under state law, and the holder of a right to water from the body of water
chooses to donate all or a portion of the person's water right to the trust
water system to assist in providing those instream flows on a temporary or
permanent basis, the department shall accept the donation on such terms as the
person may prescribe as long as the donation satisfies the requirements of
subsection (4) of this section and the other applicable requirements of this
chapter and the terms prescribed are relevant and material to protecting any
interest in the water right retained by the donor. Once accepted, such rights
are trust water rights within the conditions prescribed by the donor.

(2) The department may
enter into leases, contracts, or such other arrangements with other persons or
entities as appropriate, to ensure that trust water rights acquired in
accordance with this chapter may be exercised to the fullest possible extent.

(3) Trust water rights
may be acquired by the state on a temporary or permanent basis.

(4) A water right
donated under subsection (1)(b) of this section shall not exceed the extent to
which the water right was exercised during the five years before the donation
nor may the total of any portion of the water right remaining with the donor
plus the donated portion of the water right exceed the extent to which the
water right was exercised during the five years before the donation. A water
right holder who believes his or her water right has been impaired by a trust
water right donated under subsection (1)(b) of this section may request that
the department review the impairment claim. If the department determines that
exercising the trust water right resulting from the donation or exercising a
portion of that trust water right donated under subsection (1)(b) of this
section is impairing existing water rights in violation of RCW 90.42.070, the
trust water right shall be altered by the department to eliminate the
impairment. Any decision of the department to alter or not to alter a trust
water right donated under subsection (1)(b) of this section is appealable to
the pollution control hearings board under RCW 43.21B.230. A donated water right's
status as a trust water right under this subsection is not evidence of the
validity or quantity of the water right.

(5) The
provisions of RCW 90.03.380 and 90.03.390 do not apply to donations for
instream flows described in subsection (1)(b) of this section, but do apply
to other transfers of water rights under this section.

(((5))) (6)
No funds may be expended for the purchase of water rights by the state pursuant
to this section unless specifically appropriated for this purpose by the
legislature.

(7) Any water right
conveyed to the trust water right system as a gift that is expressly
conditioned to limit its use to instream purposes shall be managed by the
department for public purposes to ensure that it qualifies as a gift that is
deductible for federal income taxation purposes for the person or entity
conveying the water right.

(8) If the
department acquires a trust water right by lease in an area in which a drought
order has been issued under RCW 43.83B.405 and is in effect at the time the
department leases the water right, the amount of the trust water right shall
not exceed the extent to which the water right was exercised during the five
years before the acquisition was made nor may the total of any portion of the
water right remaining with the original water right holder plus the portion of
the water right leased by the department exceed the extent to which the water
right was exercised during the five years before the acquisition. A water
right holder who believes his or her water right has been impaired by a trust
water right leased under this subsection may request that the department review
the impairment claim. If the department determines that exercising the trust
water right resulting from the leasing or exercising a portion of that trust
water right leased under this subsection is impairing existing water rights in
violation of RCW 90.42.070, the trust water right shall be altered by the
department to eliminate the impairment. Any decision of the department to
alter or not to alter a trust water right leased under this subsection is
appealable to the pollution control hearings board under RCW 43.21B.230. The
department's leasing of a trust water right under this subsection is not
evidence of the validity or quantity of the water right.

(9) For a water
right donated to or acquired by the trust water rights program on a temporary
basis, the full quantity of water diverted or withdrawn to exercise the right
before the donation or acquisition shall be placed in the trust water rights
program and shall revert to the donor or person from whom it was acquired when
the trust period ends.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
32. (1) By December 31, 2004,
the department of ecology must report to the appropriate legislative committees
the pertinent experience acquired in implementing the various components of
this act that are under its jurisdiction.

(2) Beginning December
31, 2001, and ending on December 31, 2004, the department of ecology shall
report to the legislature by January 1st of each year on the results of
processing applications under RCW 90.03.380(5) and processing applications
through water conservancy boards under chapter 90.80 RCW. In the report due on
December 31, 2004, the department of ecology shall provide an evaluation and
make recommendations regarding modification of any of the provisions of RCW
90.03.380(5).

(3) By October 1, 2001,
the office of financial management must complete an assessment of watershed
planning, including evaluation of the performance of both watershed planning
units and state agencies involved in watershed planning. The office's
assessment must address the progress of planning units toward completion of
watershed plans and the use of funds provided by the state of Washington to
planning units and state agencies for developing those plans. The assessment
must include an assessment of the progress of planning units and the department
of ecology in setting instream flows. The office must report the results of
the assessment to the appropriate committees of the legislature, and the
governor.

(4) Beginning December
31, 2001, and ending on December 31, 2004, the office of financial management
shall review and report to the legislature by January 1st of each year on
whether the department of ecology has adequate funding for fulfilling the
department's responsibilities for processing applications through water
conservancy boards under chapter 90.80 RCW.

(5) The office of
financial management, in consultation with the departments of revenue, health,
and ecology, must evaluate the long-term revenue impacts and the costs and
benefits of the deductions and exclusions authorized by section 26 of this
act. The office of financial management must also evaluate the costs and
benefits and revenue impacts of other potential water conservation tax
incentives, including but not limited to those that may involve the sales, use,
property, utility, and business and occupations taxes. The office of financial
management must report its findings regarding tax incentives by December 31,
2001, to the legislature's standing committees with jurisdiction over water
resources and the legislative fiscal committees.

(6) The office of
financial management, in consultation with the departments of health and
ecology, must evaluate the level of water savings occurring from water
suppliers' use of the tax incentive provisions in section 26 of this act and
must report its findings to the legislature by December 31, 2002.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
33. If any provision of this
act or its application to any person or circumstance is held invalid, the
remainder of the act or the application of the provision to other persons or
circumstances is not affected.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 34. This act is necessary for
the immediate preservation of the public peace, health, or safety, or support
of the state government and its existing public institutions, and takes effect
immediately.

---
END ---