BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF
WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1. RCW 43.63A.750 and 1999
c 295 s 1 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) A competitive grant
program to assist nonprofit organizations, local governments, and other
entities as determined by the department in acquiring, constructing, or
rehabilitating performing arts, art museums, and cultural facilities is
created.

(2)(a) The department
shall submit a list of recommended performing arts, art museum projects, and
cultural organization projects eligible for funding to the governor and the
legislature in the department's biennial capital budget request beginning with
the 2001-2003 biennium and thereafter. The list, in priority order, shall
include a description of each project, the amount of recommended state funding,
and documentation of nonstate funds to be used for the project. The total
amount of recommended state funding for projects on a biennial project list
shall not exceed four million dollars. The department may provide an
additional alternate project list which shall not exceed five hundred thousand
dollars.

(b) The department
shall establish a competitive process to prioritize applications for state
assistance as follows:

(i) The department
shall conduct a statewide solicitation of project applications from nonprofit
organizations, local governments, and other entities, as determined by the
department. The department shall evaluate and rank applications in
consultation with a citizen advisory committee, including a representative from
the state arts commission, using objective criteria. The evaluation and
ranking process shall also consider local community support for projects and an
examination of existing assets that applicants may apply to projects.

(ii) The department may
establish the amount of state grant assistance for individual project applications
but the amount shall not exceed twenty percent of the estimated total capital
cost or actual cost of a project, whichever is less. The remaining portions of
the project capital cost shall be a match from nonstate sources. The nonstate
match may include cash, the value of real property when acquired solely for the
purpose of the project, and in-kind contributions. The department is
authorized to set matching requirements for individual projects. State
assistance may be used to fund separate definable phases of a project if the
project demonstrates adequate progress and has secured the necessary match
funding.

(iii) The department
shall not sign contracts or otherwise financially obligate funds under this
section until the legislature has approved a specific list of projects. In
contracts for grants authorized under this section, the department shall
include provisions requiring that capital improvements be held by the grantee
for a specified period of time appropriate to the amount of the grant and that
facilities be used for the express purpose of the grant. If the grantee is
found to be out of compliance with provisions of the contract, the grantee
shall repay to the state general fund the principal amount of the grant plus
interest calculated at the rate of interest on state of Washington general
obligation bonds issued most closely to the date of authorization of the grant.

Sec. 2. RCW 43.63A.125 and 1999
c 295 s 3 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) The department
shall establish a competitive process to solicit proposals for and prioritize
projects that assist nonprofit organizations, local governments, and other
entities as determined by the department in acquiring, constructing, or
rehabilitating facilities used for the delivery of nonresidential social
services.

(2) The department
shall establish a competitive process to prioritize applications for the
assistance as follows:

(a) The department
shall conduct a statewide solicitation of project applications from local
governments, nonprofit organizations, and other entities, as determined by the
department. The department shall evaluate and rank applications in
consultation with a citizen advisory committee using objective criteria. At a
minimum, applicants must demonstrate that the requested assistance will
increase the efficiency or quality of the social services it provides to
citizens. The evaluation and ranking process shall also include an examination
of existing assets that applicants may apply to projects. Grant assistance
under this section shall not exceed twenty-five percent of the total cost of
the project. The nonstate portion of the total project cost may include cash,
the value of real property when acquired solely for the purpose of the project,
and in-kind contributions.

(b) The department
shall submit a prioritized list of recommended projects to the governor and the
legislature in the department's biennial capital budget request beginning with
the 2001-2003 biennium and thereafter. For the 1999-2001 biennium, the
department shall conduct a solicitation and ranking process, as described in
(a) of this subsection, for projects to be funded by appropriations provided
for this program in the 1999-2001 capital budget. The list shall include a
description of each project, the amount of recommended state funding, and
documentation of nonstate funds to be used for the project. The total amount
of recommended state funding for projects on a biennial project list shall not
exceed four million dollars. The department may provide an additional
alternate project list which shall not exceed five hundred thousand dollars.
Except for the 1999-2001 biennium, the department shall not sign contracts or
otherwise financially obligate funds under this section until the legislature
has approved a specific list of projects.

(c) In contracts for
grants authorized under this section the department shall include provisions
which require that capital improvements shall be held by the grantee for a
specified period of time appropriate to the amount of the grant and that
facilities shall be used for the express purpose of the grant. If the grantee
is found to be out of compliance with provisions of the contract, the grantee
shall repay to the state general fund the principal amount of the grant plus
interest calculated at the rate of interest on state of Washington general
obligation bonds issued most closely to the date of authorization of the grant.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 3. This act expires June 30,
2007.

---
END ---