BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF
WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec.
1. (1) The legislative task
force on local park and recreation maintenance and operations is created and is
comprised of the following members, who are appointed as follows:

(a) Four members of the
house of representatives, two from each major caucus, appointed by the
co-speakers of the house of representatives;

(b) Four members of the
senate, two from each major caucus, appointed by the president of the senate;

(c) Two representatives
of county government parks and recreation, one of whom must be from a county
that is mostly urban and one from a county that is mostly rural, appointed by a
statewide organization representing county governments;

(d) Two representatives
of city government parks and recreation, one of whom must be from a city with a
population over thirty thousand people and one from a city with a population
less than thirty thousand people, appointed by a statewide organization
representing city governments;

(e) Three
representatives of local parks users, one of whom must represent the interests
of team sport users, one of whom must represent the interests of individual
users, and one of whom must represent youth users, appointed by a statewide
organization that represents local park and recreation interests;

(f) A representative of
the office of financial management, appointed by the director of the office of
financial management;

(g) A representative of
the sporting goods and outdoor recreation products industry, appointed by a
statewide organization representing producers and retailers of such
merchandise;

(h) A representative of
commercial business interests that are affected by the existence of local
parks, appointed by a statewide organization representing the interests of
commercial business in this state;

(i) A representative of
an environmental interest organization with familiarity and expertise in parks
land use issues, appointed by a statewide organization representing
environmental interests; and

(j) A representative
from either a metropolitan park district, a park and recreation service area,
or a park and recreation district.

(2) The task force must
convene as soon as possible upon appointment of its members. The task force
must elect a chair and agree upon procedures for conducting the business of the
task force. Staff support for the task force must be provided by the
interagency committee for outdoor recreation.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
2. (1) By December 1, 2001,
the task force established in section 1 of this act must report and recommend
to the legislature:

(a) An analysis
detailing current local park and recreation uses and trends;

(b) An analysis
detailing current funding for local park and recreation maintenance and
operations;

(c) An analysis of the
benefits that local parks provide to the state;

(d) An analysis of the
anticipated future needs of local parks and recreation agencies, including
utilization, maintenance, operations, and other needs identified; and

(e) Recommended sources
of funding to meet the operational needs of local parks and recreation agencies
identified in the report.

(2) The task force must
make recommendations to the legislature on any other issues, and at such times,
as the task force deems important to the successful implementation of this act.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
3. The task force shall meet
as and when it sees fit in order to properly carry out the functions and duties
set forth in this act. However, in order to facilitate substantial and
inclusive input, the task force shall meet in at least four different parts of
the state.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
4. This act expires June 30,
2002.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 5. This act is necessary for
the immediate preservation of the public peace, health, or safety, or support
of the state government and its existing public institutions, and takes effect
immediately.

---
END ---