BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF
WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1. RCW 74.08A.290 and 1997
c 58 s 316 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) It is the intent of
the legislature that the department is authorized to engage in competitive
contracting using performance-based contracts to provide all ((work))
activities ((authorized in chapter 58, Laws of 1997, including the job
search component authorized in section 312 of this act)) related to
services to WorkFirst recipients, including case management.

(2) The department may
use competitive performance-based contracting to select which vendors will
participate in the WorkFirst program. Performance-based contracts shall be
awarded based on factors that include but are not limited to the criteria
listed in RCW 74.08A.410, past performance of the contractor, demonstrated
ability to perform the contract effectively, financial strength of the contractor,
and merits of the proposal for services submitted by the contractor. Contracts
shall be made without regard to whether the contractor is a public or private
entity.

(3) The department may
contract for an evaluation of the competitive contracting practices and
outcomes to be performed by an independent entity with expertise in government
privatization and competitive strategies. The evaluation shall include
quarterly progress reports to the fiscal committees of the legislature and to
the governor, starting at the first quarter after the effective date of the
first competitive contract and ending two years after the effective date of the
first competitive contract.

(4) The
department shall seek independent assistance in developing contracting
strategies to implement this section. Assistance may include but is not
limited to development of contract language, design of requests for proposal,
developing full cost information on government services, evaluation of bids,
and providing for equal competition between private and public entities.

--- END ---