BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF
WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec.
1. (1) The legislature finds
that school mapping would:

(a) Protect all
students in Washington;

(b) Help schools and
emergency response teams in emergencies like the recent Columbine, Colorado,
shootings;

(c) Help officers on
the ground to know how a school is laid out in an emergency, since some schools
are so complex that when an officer arrives at the school, the officer may be
unable to determine where a potential gunman is located; and

(d) Be used for any
potential crisis situation.

(2) As used in this
section, school mapping includes:

(a) Mapping out the
physical structures of all schools in case of an emergency;

(b) Taking aerial shots
from the air to understand the physical complexity of a school;

(c) Photographing the
school from the air so the officers on the ground will know just how the school
is laid out in case of an emergency;

(d) Giving an officer
as much information about the school layout as possible by creating a
centralized data base for school layouts; and

(e) Providing for
information sharing between the schools and emergency response teams.

(3) The Washington
association of sheriffs and police chiefs and the Washington association of
fire chiefs shall study and determine the feasibility and costs of:

(a) Completing a school
map for all K-12 schools within the state;

(b) Including all
school maps on a computer disk;

(c) Providing all
patrol cars and fire engines with a mounted computer so that the officer can
use the computer disk to view pictures of the layout of each school, including
a blueprint of the school, an aerial photo, and a photo of each school room;
and

(d) Providing for
maintenance of the computer disks by the fire chief and the Washington
association of sheriffs and police chiefs.

(4) The Washington
association of sheriffs and police chiefs and the Washington association of
fire chiefs shall submit a report on the study and recommendations to the
legislature by January 1, 2002.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 2. The sum of four hundred
fifty thousand dollars, or as much thereof as may be necessary, is appropriated
for the fiscal year ending June 30, 2003, from the general fund to the
Washington association of sheriffs and police chiefs for the purposes of this
act.

---
END ---