BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF
WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1. RCW 28A.500.030 and 1999
c 317 s 3 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) Allocation
of state matching funds to eligible districts for local effort assistance shall
be determined as follows:

(((1))) (a)
Funds raised by the district through maintenance and operation levies shall be
matched with state funds using the following ratio of state funds to levy
funds:

(((a))) (i)
The difference between the district's twelve percent levy rate and the
statewide average twelve percent levy rate; to

(((b))) (ii)
The statewide average twelve percent levy rate.

(((2))) (b)
The maximum amount of state matching funds for districts eligible for local
effort assistance shall be the district's twelve percent levy amount,
multiplied by the following percentage:

(((a))) (i)
The difference between the district's twelve percent levy rate and the
statewide average twelve percent levy rate; divided by

(((b))) (ii)
The district's twelve percent levy rate.

(2) For
school districts without a voter-approved maintenance and operation levy, state
matching money shall be provided as described in this section if the district
requested a maintenance and operation levy subsequent to January 1, 2001, that
received an affirmative vote from a majority but fewer than three-fifths of the
voters voting on the ballot proposition. The amount requested meeting the
criteria in this subsection shall be used in lieu of funds raised for
calculations in subsection (1) of this section. If the district made more than
one unsuccessful attempt subsequent to January 1, 2001, to pass a maintenance
and operation levy for the school year, the amount receiving the largest
percentage affirmative votes shall be used in lieu of funds raised for
calculations in subsection (1) of this section.

--- END ---