BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF
WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1. RCW 28A.230.010 and 1990
c 33 s 237 are each amended to read as follows:

School district boards
of directors shall identify and offer courses with content that meet or exceed:

(1) The basic education
skills identified in RCW 28A.150.210;

(2) The
graduation requirements under RCW 28A.230.090; and

(3) The courses
required to meet the minimum college entrance requirements and provide
additional options under RCW 28A.230.130.

Such
courses may be applied or theoretical, academic, or vocational.

Sec. 2. RCW 28A.230.130 and 1991
c 116 s 9 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) All public high
schools of the state shall provide ((a program)), directly or in
cooperation with a community or technical college, an apprenticeship
committee, or another school district, for students the opportunity to
take any or all of the following courses of study within each educational
pathway required to be offered under RCW 28A.655.060(3)(c):

(a) A course of
study for students whose educational plans include application for entrance
to a baccalaureate-granting institution after being granted a high school
diploma. The program shall help these students to meet at least the minimum
entrance requirements under RCW 28B.10.050;

(b) A course of
study for students whose educational plans include the pursuit of a
professional or technical certificate or degree that requires less than four
years of postsecondary education. The program shall help these students
receive industry certification upon completion of the program, and/or have the
opportunity to articulate to postsecondary education and training programs
related to their secondary program; and

(c) A course of
study for students who are planning to defer further educational plans and
enter the world of work upon graduation from high school. The program shall
help students demonstrate the application of essential learning to the world of
work, occupation-specific skills, knowledge of more than one career or job
option within their chosen pathway, and general workplace skills.

(2) The
state board of education, upon request from local school districts, may grant
temporary exemptions from the requirements to provide the program described in
subsection (1) of this section for reasons relating to school district size and
the availability of staff authorized to teach subjects which must be provided.

---
END ---