BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF
WASHINGTON:

_5 Sec. 1. RCW
36.70A.110 and 1997 c 429 s 24 are each amended to

_6 read as follows:

_7 (1) Each county that is required or chooses to plan
under RCW

_8 36.70A.040 shall designate an urban growth area or areas
within

_9 which urban growth shall be encouraged and outside of
which growth

10 can occur only if it is not urban in nature. Each city
that is

11 located in such a county shall be included within an
urban growth

12 area. An urban growth area may include more than a
single city. An

13 urban growth area may include territory that is located
outside of

14 a city only if such territory already is characterized
by urban

15 growth whether or not the urban growth area includes a
city, or is

16 adjacent to territory already characterized by urban
growth, or is

17 a designated new fully contained community as defined by
RCW

18 36.70A.350.

p. 1 HB
1843

_1 (2) Based upon the growth management population
projection made

_2 for the county by the office of financial management,
the county

_3 and each city within the county shall include areas and
densities

_4 sufficient to permit the urban growth that is projected
to occur

_5 in the county or city for the succeeding twenty-year
period. Each

_6 urban growth area shall permit urban densities and shall
include

_7 greenbelt and open space areas. An urban growth area
determination

_8 ((may)) shall include for the county
and each city within the

_9 county, a reasonable land market supply factor,
an analysis of

10 existing water resources and water rights sufficient
to serve the

11 projected growth, the equitable distribution of
population density

12 across a county's urban growth areas, and state
highway capacity

13 sufficient to serve the projected growth, and
shall permit a range

14 of urban densities and uses. In determining this market
factor,

15 cities and counties ((may)) shall consider
local

16 circumstances. Cities and counties have discretion in
their

17 comprehensive plans to make many choices about
accommodating

18 growth.

19 Within one year of July 1, 1990, each county that as
of June 1,

20 1991, was required or chose to plan under RCW
36.70A.040, shall

21 begin consulting with each city located within its
boundaries and

22 each city shall propose the location of an urban growth
area.

23 Within sixty days of the date the county legislative
authority of

24 a county adopts its resolution of intention or of
certification by

25 the office of financial management, all other counties
that are

26 required or choose to plan under RCW 36.70A.040 shall
begin this

27 consultation with each city located within its
boundaries. The

28 county shall attempt to reach agreement with each city
on the

29 location of an urban growth area within which the city
is

30 located. If such an agreement is not reached with each
city located

31 within the urban growth area, the county shall justify
in writing

32 why it so designated the area an urban growth area. A
city may

33 object formally with the department over the designation
of the

34 urban growth area within which it is located. Where
appropriate,

35 the department shall attempt to resolve the conflicts,
including

36 the use of mediation services.

37 (3) Urban growth should be located first in areas
already

38 characterized by urban growth that have adequate
existing public

HB 1843 p. 2

_1 facility and service capacities to serve such
development, second

_2 in areas already characterized by urban growth that will
be served

_3 adequately by a combination of both existing public
facilities and

_4 services and any additional needed public facilities and
services

_5 that are provided by either public or private sources,
and third

_6 in the remaining portions of the urban growth areas.
Urban growth

_7 may also be located in designated new fully contained
communities

_8 as defined by RCW 36.70A.350.

_9 (4) In general, cities are the units of local
government most

10 appropriate to provide urban governmental services. In
general, it

11 is not appropriate that urban governmental services be
extended to

12 or expanded in rural areas except in those limited
circumstances

13 shown to be necessary to protect basic public health and
safety

14 and the environment and when such services are
financially

15 supportable at rural densities and do not permit urban

16 development.

17 (5) On or before October 1, 1993, each county that
was

18 initially required to plan under RCW 36.70A.040(1) shall
adopt

19 development regulations designating interim urban growth
areas

20 under this chapter. Within three years and three months
of the date

21 the county legislative authority of a county adopts its
resolution

22 of intention or of certification by the office of
financial

23 management, all other counties that are required or
choose to plan

24 under RCW 36.70A.040 shall adopt development regulations

25 designating interim urban growth areas under this
chapter. Adoption

26 of the interim urban growth areas may only occur after
public

27 notice; public hearing; and compliance with the state

28 environmental policy act, chapter 43.21C RCW, and RCW

29 36.70A.110. Such action may be appealed to the
appropriate growth

30 management hearings board under RCW 36.70A.280. Final
urban growth

31 areas shall be adopted at the time of comprehensive plan
adoption

32 under this chapter.

33 (6) Each county shall include designations of urban
growth

34 areas in its comprehensive plan.

35 Sec. 2. RCW
43.62.035 and 1997 c 429 s 26 are each amended to read

36 as follows:

37 The office of financial management shall determine
the

p. 3 HB
1843

_1 population of each county of the state annually as of
April 1st of

_2 each year and on or before July 1st of each year shall
file a

_3 certificate with the secretary of state showing its
determination

_4 of the population for each county. The office of
financial

_5 management also shall determine the percentage increase
in

_6 population for each county over the preceding ten-year
period, as

_7 of April 1st, and shall file a certificate with the
secretary of

_8 state by July 1st showing its determination. At least
once every

_9 five years or upon the availability of decennial census
data,

10 whichever is later, and taking into consideration
population

11 trends of the previous ten years and an analysis of
existing water

12 resources and water rights sufficient to serve the
projected

13 growth, the office of financial management shall
prepare twenty-

14 year growth management planning population projections
required by

15 RCW 36.70A.110 for each county that adopts a
comprehensive plan

16 under RCW 36.70A.040 and shall review these projections
with such

17 counties and the cities in those counties before final

18 adoption. The county and its cities may provide to the
office such

19 information as they deem relevant to the office's
projection, and

20 the office shall consider and comment on such
information before

21 adoption. Each projection shall be expressed as a
reasonable range

22 developed within the standard state high and low
projection. The

23 middle range shall represent the office's estimate of
the most

24 likely population projection for the county. If any city
or county

25 believes that a projection will not accurately reflect
actual

26 population growth in a county, it may petition the
office to

27 revise the projection accordingly. The office shall
complete the

28 first set of ranges for every county by December 31,
1995.

29 A comprehensive plan adopted or amended before
December 31,

30 1995, shall not be considered to be in noncompliance
with the

31 twenty-year growth management planning population
projection if

32 the projection used in the comprehensive plan is in
compliance

33 with the range later adopted under this section.

‑‑‑ END ‑‑‑

HB 1843 p. 4