BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF
WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec.
1. (1) The legislature finds
that in the 1920s the Cowlitz river near the confluence of the Columbia river
in Longview, Washington was diverted from its original course by dredging and
construction of a dike. As a result, a portion of the original bed of the
Cowlitz river became a nonnavigable body of shallow water. Another portion of
the original bed of the Cowlitz river became part of a dike and is indistinguishable
from existing islands. The main channel of the Cowlitz river was diverted over
uplands to the south of the original bed and has continued as a navigable
channel.

(2) The legislature
finds that continued ownership of the nonnavigable portion of the original bed
of the Cowlitz river near the confluence of the Columbia river no longer serves
the state's interest in navigation. Ownership of the existing navigable bed
of the Cowlitz river would better serve the state's interest in navigation. It
is also in the state's interest to resolve any disputes that have arisen
because state-owned land is now indistinguishable from privately owned land
within the dike.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
2. A new section is added
to chapter 79.08 RCW to read as follows:

(1) The department of
natural resources is authorized to exchange bedlands abandoned through
rechanneling of the Cowlitz river near the confluence of the Columbia river so
that the state obtains clear title to the Cowlitz river as it now exists or
where it may exist in the future through the processes of erosion and
accretion.

(2) The department of
natural resources is also authorized to exchange bedlands and enter into
boundary line agreements to resolve any disputes that may arise over the
location of state-owned lands now comprising the dike that was created in the
1920s.

(3) For purposes of
this act, "Cowlitz river near the confluence of the Columbia river"
means those tidelands and bedlands of the Cowlitz river fronting and abutting
sections 10, 11, and 14, township 7 north, range 2 west, Willamette Meridian
and fronting and abutting the Huntington Donation Land Claim No. 47 and the
Blakeny Donation Land Claim No. 43, township 7 north, range 2 west, Willamette
Meridian.

(4) Nothing in this act
shall be deemed to convey to the department of natural resources the power of
eminent domain.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 3. If any provision of this
act or its application to any person or circumstance is held invalid, the
remainder of the act or the application of the provision to other persons or
circumstances is not affected.

---
END ---