BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF
WASHINGTON:

_5 Sec. 1. RCW 78.44.085
and 1997 c 413 s 1 are each amended to read

_6 as follows:

_7 (1) An applicant for a public or private reclamation
permit

_8 shall pay ((an)) a nonrefundable
application fee to the department

_9 before being granted a surface mining permit. The
amount of the

10 application fee shall be ((six hundred fifty)) one
thousand

11 dollars.

12 (2) After June 30, ((1993)) 2001, each
public or private permit

13 holder shall pay an annual permit fee of ((six
hundred fifty)) one

14 thousand dollars. The annual permit fee shall be
payable to the

15 department on the first anniversary of the permit date
and each

16 year thereafter. Annual fees paid by a county for mines
used

17 exclusively for public works projects and having less
than seven

18 acres of disturbed area per mine shall not exceed one
thousand

p. 1 EHB
1845

_1 dollars. Annual fees are waived for all mines used
primarily for

_2 public works projects if the mines are owned and
primarily

_3 operated by counties with 1993 populations of less than
twenty

_4 thousand persons, and if each mine has less than seven
acres of

_5 disturbed area.

_6 (3) Appeals from any determination of the department
shall not

_7 stay the requirement to pay any annual permit fee.
Failure to pay

_8 the annual fee may constitute grounds for an order to
suspend

_9 surface mining or cancellation of the reclamation permit
as

10 provided in this chapter.

11 (4) All fees collected by the department shall be
deposited

12 into the surface mining reclamation account.

13 (5) If the department delegates enforcement
responsibilities to

14 a county, city, or town, the department may allocate
funds

15 collected under this section to the county, city, or
town.

16 (6) Within sixty days after receipt of a permit
application,

17 the department shall advise applicants of any
information

18 necessary to successfully complete the application.

19 NEW SECTION. Sec. 2. By January 1, 2003,
the department of

20 natural resources shall report to the appropriate policy
and

21 fiscal committees of the legislature regarding program

22 deliverables and uses of the new fee revenue.

23 NEW SECTION. Sec. 3. This act is necessary
for the immediate

24 preservation of the public peace, health, or safety, or
support of

25 the state government and its existing public
institutions, and

26 takes effect July 1, 2001.

‑‑‑ END ‑‑‑

EHB 1845 p. 2