BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF
WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec.
1. A new section is added
to chapter 28B.10 RCW to read as follows:

(1) Subject to
legislative appropriation, the higher education coordinating board with the
assistance of the state board for community and technical colleges, shall
establish and administer an earned income training credit pilot project as
provided in this section for eligible persons who received an earned income tax
credit under the federal internal revenue code. The higher education
coordinating board and the state board for community and technical colleges may
adopt rules as necessary to implement this section.

(2) Eligible persons
must be resident students as defined under RCW 28B.15.012(2) (a) through (d),
must have qualifying children, and have received an earned income tax credit
under the federal internal revenue code.

(3) Eligible persons
may receive earned income training credits in an amount equal to fifty percent
of the earned income tax credits received in the previous three tax years, up
to the maximum established in subsection (5) of this section.

(4) The higher
education coordinating board shall award the earned income training credits and
the financial aid supplement on a first-come, first-served basis, subject to
available funding.

(5)(a) For each school
year beginning with the 2001-02 school year, the higher education coordinating
board shall determine the maximum amount that an eligible person may receive in
earned income training credits, which shall equal six times the quarterly
tuition, as defined in RCW 28B.15.020, for that school year at community
colleges.

(b) An eligible person
must have a minimum of one thousand dollars in training credits before the
credits may be used.

(c) Earned income
training credits are not transferable.

(6) Subject to
available funding, earned income training credits may be used for tuition or
job training.

(a) The training credit
may be used for tuition at:

(i) An institution of
higher education as defined in RCW 28B.10.016, not including graduate level
courses;

(ii) Any college,
university, school, or institute in the state of Washington offering
instruction beyond the high school level that is a member of an accrediting
association recognized by rule of the higher education coordinating board; or

(iii) A private
vocational school as defined in RCW 28C.10.060.

(b) The training credit
may be used to reimburse a current or prospective employer who redeems the
credits from the eligible person and agrees to provide training for the
eligible person under a training contract entered into by the current or
prospective employer, the employee, and an eligible training institution under
the rules of the state board for community and technical colleges.

(i) The state board for
community and technical colleges shall administer on-the-job training as part
of the pilot program.

(ii) The training
contract under this subsection (6)(b) must meet the state board for community
and technical college's standards for training and must establish the monetary
value of the training.

(iii) The employer
participating under a contract to train an eligible person who is a current or
prospective employee may be reimbursed for the on-the-job training provided
under the contract in an amount not exceeding the value of the training as
established by the contract or the earned income training credits redeemed by
the employer, whichever is less.

(iv) Twenty-five
percent of funds set aside for training credits shall be used for on-the-job
training under this subsection (6)(b).

(c) The higher
education coordinating board shall transfer the necessary information about an
eligible person applying the training credits under subsection (6)(b) to the
state board for community and technical colleges.

(7) The state board for
community and technical colleges shall adopt rules setting standards for
defining the training and for establishing the value of the training under the
training contract for employer reimbursement purposes.

(8) As required, the
higher education coordinating board shall work with the department of revenue
and the federal internal revenue service to determine a person's eligibility.

(9) If an eligible
person is enrolled in a program of study of at least half-time, the person may
receive state-subsidized child care and a financial aid supplement.

(a) The higher
education coordinating board shall, in collaboration with the state board for
community and technical colleges and the department of social and health
services, connect an eligible person with state-subsidized child care in
currently established programs. Persons receiving training or education under
this section are eligible for working connections child care.

(b) A financial aid
supplement shall be available for the unmet need after the receipt of training
credits and the total financial aid awarded for the academic year to the
student from federal, state, and institutional programs.

(i) The eligible person
must be attending an institution eligible to participate in federal and state
financial aid programs.

(ii) The eligible
person must make satisfactory progress in a degree or certificate program as
defined by the institution offering the program.

(iii) The financial aid
supplement is subject to the maximum as set by the higher education
coordinating board and shall not exceed two times the annual tuition at a
public community college.

(c) If an eligible
person with training credits is receiving tuition assistance from another
source, he or she is still eligible for the financial aid supplement and child
care under this subsection (9).

(10) Training credits
shall be considered self-help for the purposes of financial aid and shall not
reduce or supplant state and federal financial aid grants up to the amount of
financial need.

(11) The higher
education coordinating board shall work with the state board for community and
technical colleges to promote the training program to potentially eligible
persons as well as streamline the eligibility process.

(12) An amount not to
exceed four percent of funds available for the earned income training credit
program may be expended on agency administrative costs. Agency administrative
costs are indirect expenses such as personnel, payroll, contract
administration, fiscal services, and other overhead costs.

(13) The higher
education coordinating board may transfer funds to the state board for
community and technical colleges as necessary to accomplish the purpose of this
section and section 2 of this act.

(14) This section
expires June 30, 2003.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
2. A new section is added
to chapter 28B.10 RCW to read as follows:

(1) The higher
education coordinating board shall, with the cooperation of the state board for
community and technical colleges and the employment security department, report
on the impact of section 1 of this act to the work force training and education
coordinating board, or a successor board, and the appropriate committees of the
legislature by December 1, 2003. The report must include:

(a) The number of people
receiving training;

(b) The cost of the
training;

(c) The cost of program
administration;

(d) For those persons
whose credits were used for training at institutions of higher education under
section 1 of this act:

(i) Their employment
status;

(ii) The number of
workers receiving tuition benefits by institution and general area of study;

(iii) Training
outcomes, including indices of placement rates, student demographics, training
plan completion rates, and comparisons of preprogram and postprogram wage
levels; and

(iv) The number of
people receiving a financial aid supplement and child care; and

(e) For those persons
using the training credit for employee training under section 1 of this act, a
report on:

(i) Their job and wage
progression; and

(ii) The number of
workers receiving training by industry, size of firm, and occupation.

(2) This section
expires December 31, 2003.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
3. (1) The sum of three
million dollars, or as much thereof as may be necessary, is appropriated for
the fiscal year ending June 30, 2002, from the general fund-federal temporary
assistance for needy families grant to the higher education coordinating board
to carry out the purposes of this act.

(2) The
sum of seven million dollars, or as much thereof as may be necessary, is
appropriated for the fiscal year ending June 30, 2003, from the general
fund-federal temporary assistance for needy families grant to the higher
education coordinating board to carry out the purposes of this act.

---
END ---