BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF
WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec.
1. (1) The legislature finds
that current economic conditions and declining resources at the federal, state,
and local level adversely affect the ability of low-income and underserved
persons to obtain quality and affordable health care. Community health centers
provide access to health care to those persons who are otherwise unable to
obtain these services.

(2) The legislature
further finds that community health centers face the challenge of meeting a
growing demand for services in cramped and outdated facilities and meeting the
need of establishing new facilities to serve additional communities with large,
underserved populations.

(3) The legislature
declares that it is in the public interest to establish a continuously
renewable resource known as the community health center capital trust fund
account to assist low and very low-income citizens and other underserved
citizens to meet their basic health care needs.

Sec. 2. RCW 70.37.020 and 1994 c
92 s 505 are each amended to read as follows:

((As used in this
chapter,)) The ((following words and terms have the following
meanings,)) definitions in this section apply throughout this chapter
unless the context ((indicates or)) clearly requires ((another
or different meaning or intent and the singular of any term shall encompass the
plural and the plural the singular unless the context indicates))
otherwise((:)).

(1)
"Authority" means the Washington health care facilities authority
created by RCW 70.37.030 or any board, body, commission, department or officer
succeeding to the principal functions thereof or to whom the powers conferred upon
the authority shall be given by law.

(2) "Bonds"
mean bonds, notes or other evidences of indebtedness of the authority issued
pursuant hereto.

(3) "Community
health center" means a nonprofit corporation providing health care
services to needy populations where all of the following apply: (a) It is tax
exempt under section 501(c)(3) of the internal revenue code (26 U.S.C. Sec.
501(c)(3)); (b) it is governed by a community-based board over half of whom are
users of health care services; (c) it utilizes a sliding fee scale based on the
federal poverty level; (d) at least two-fifths of the patients it serves are
uninsured or on medicaid; and (e) at least three-fourths of the patients it
serves have incomes below two hundred percent of the federal poverty level.

(4) "Health
care facility" means any land, structure, system, machinery, equipment or
other real or personal property or appurtenances useful for or associated with
delivery of inpatient or outpatient health care service or support for such
care or any combination thereof which is operated or undertaken in connection
with hospital, clinic, health maintenance organization, diagnostic or treatment
center, extended care facility, or any facility providing or designed to
provide therapeutic, convalescent, or preventive health care services,
and shall include research and support facilities of a comprehensive cancer
center, but excluding, however, any facility which is maintained by a
participant primarily for rental or lease to self-employed health care professionals
or as an independent nursing home or other facility primarily offering
domiciliary care.

(((4))) (5)
"Participant" means any city, county, or other municipal
corporation or agency or political subdivision of the state or any corporation,
hospital, comprehensive cancer center, or health maintenance organization
authorized by law to operate nonprofit health care facilities, or any
affiliate, as defined by ((regulations promulgated)) rules adopted
by the director of the department of financial institutions pursuant to RCW
21.20.450, which is a nonprofit corporation acting for the benefit of any
entity described in this subsection.

(((5))) (6)
"Project" means a specific health care facility or any combination of
health care facilities, constructed, purchased, acquired, leased, used, owned,
or operated by a participant, and alterations, additions to, renovations,
enlargements, betterments, and reconstructions thereof.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
3. (1) The community health
center assistance program is created within the authority. The intent of the
program is to carry out the purposes of this section and section 4 of this
act. The programs and authority powers under this section shall be deemed to
be in addition to and separate from the other powers, programs, and activities
of the authority authorized by law.

(2) The community
health center capital trust fund account is created in the custody of the state
treasurer. All receipts from private contributions, repayment of loans, and
any other sources must be deposited into the account. It is the intent of the
legislature that state funds not be appropriated to this account for the
biennium ending June 30, 2003. Expenditures from the account may be used only
for the purposes of this section and section 4 of this act. Only the authority
or the authority's designee may authorize expenditures from the account. The
account is subject to allotment procedures under chapter 43.88 RCW, but an
appropriation is not required for expenditures. Subaccounts may also be set up
within this account.

(3) The authority shall
use moneys from the community health center capital trust fund account
established under subsection (2) of this section to guarantee or subsidize
loans for community health centers, and for other general purposes associated
with making community health center credits more attractive to the municipal
bond market, and finance in whole or in part any loans for community health
centers.

(4) Activities eligible
for assistance from the community health center capital trust fund account
established under subsection (2) of this section include but are not limited
to:

(a) New construction,
renovation, or acquisition of an existing building, or acquisition of land to
be converted into a community health center;

(b) Equipment
acquisition for community health centers;

(c) Technical
assistance, design and finance services and consultation, administrative costs
for eligible community health centers, and costs associated with providing and
administering loans to community health centers;

(d) Loan subsidies;

(e) Guarantees or
payments for eligible projects; and

(f) Refinancing of
existing debt.

(5) Moneys in the
community health center capital trust fund account may be used only for the
purposes of this section and section 4 of this act, and not for the
administrative costs of the authority.

(6) Moneys from
repayment of loans issued by the authority from the community health center
capital trust fund account may be used for all activities necessary for the
proper functioning of the community health center assistance program.

(7) Organizations that
may receive assistance from the authority under this section and section 4 of
this act are community health centers as defined in RCW 70.37.020. The
programs and authority powers under this section shall be deemed to be in
addition to and separate from the other powers, programs, and activities of the
authority authorized by law. Eligibility for assistance from the authority
under this chapter also requires that the recipient have no outstanding tax
warrants under RCW 82.32.210 at the time the grant is made.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
4. (1) During each calendar
year in which moneys in the community health center capital trust fund account,
created in section 3 of this act, are available for use by the authority for
the community health center assistance program, the authority shall announce to
all known community health centers located in the state of Washington a loan
application period of at least ninety days' duration. This announcement shall
be made as often as the executive director of the authority deems appropriate
for proper utilization of resources. The authority shall then grant as many
applications as will utilize available moneys.

(2) The authority shall
evaluate applicants based on the following considerations:

(a) Applicants must
demonstrate the ability to provide health care services to a caseload that is
comprised primarily of low-income and underserved persons;

(b) Applicants must
demonstrate the ability, stability, and resources to implement the provisions
of its application on an ongoing basis; and

(c) Applicants must
meet the definition of community health center as defined in RCW 70.37.020.

Sec. 5. RCW 70.37.090 and 1974
ex.s. c 147 s 9 are each amended to read as follows:

The authority shall
have power to require community health centers, health care facilities, and
other persons applying for its assistance in connection with the
investigation and financing of projects to pay fees and charges to provide the
authority with funds for investigation, financial feasibility studies, expenses
of issuance and sale of bonds and other charges for services provided by the
authority in connection with such projects((. All other expenses of the
authority)), including compensation of its employees and
consultants, expenses of administration, and conduct of its work and
business and other expenses. These expenses shall be paid out of such
fees and charges, out of contributions and grants to ((it)) the
authority, out of the proceeds of bonds issued for projects of participants,
or out of revenues of such projects((; none)). No expense may be
paid by the state of Washington. The authority shall have power to
establish special funds into which such money shall be received and out of
which it may be disbursed by the persons and with the procedure and in the
manner established by the authority. The authority has the power to invest
revenue from fees and charges or other income in excess of expenses. The
authority also has the power to establish special funds into which excess
revenue from fees and charges, contributions and grants, and investment
earnings on any such moneys shall be received and out of which it may be
disbursed by grant, loan, or other financing method to individual participants
with total assets of fifty million dollars or less to finance health care
facilities in accordance with the provisions of this chapter.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
6. Sections 3 and 4 of this
act are each added to chapter 70.37 RCW.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 7. If any provision of this
act or its application to any person or circumstance is held invalid, the
remainder of the act or the application of the provision to other persons or
circumstances is not affected.

---
END ---