BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF
WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec.
1. The legislature finds
that:

(1) International trade
is an integral part of the state's economy;

(2) Washington's
economy is vital to the Pacific Northwest region, which includes several states
and Canadian provinces;

(3) Increasing global
competition requires economic policies that build on the strengths of the
region and create ongoing opportunities for the sale of Washington's goods and
services;

(4) Greater efficiency
through cooperation with other states and Canadian provinces within the region
will benefit businesses in the region, as well as in Washington.

It is the intent of
this act to increase the overseas promotion of Washington's goods and services
by colocating, where feasible, the state's trade offices or offices of the
state's foreign representative contractors with comparable offices of other
states and Canadian provinces that are members of the Pacific Northwest
economic region.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
2. A new section is added
to chapter 43.23 RCW to read as follows:

(1) The director of the
department may enter into contracts with members of the Pacific Northwest
economic region, port districts, or commodity commissions for the purpose of:

(a) Establishing
foreign trade offices designed to promote the export of Washington agricultural
products; or

(b) Contracting with
overseas contractors to promote the export of Washington's agricultural
products.

(2) The department
shall report to the appropriate committees of the legislature on the results of
the export promotion efforts under this section and recommendations for
improvements.

Sec. 3. RCW 43.23.035 and 1995 c
399 s 70 are each amended to read as follows:

The department of
agriculture is hereby designated as the agency of state government for the
administration and implementation of state agricultural market development
programs and activities, both domestic and foreign, and shall, in addition to
the powers and duties otherwise imposed by law, have the following powers and
duties:

(1) To study the
potential marketability of various agricultural commodities of this state in
foreign and domestic trade;

(2) To collect,
prepare, and analyze foreign and domestic market data;

(3) To establish a
program to promote and assist in the marketing of Washington-bred horses:
PROVIDED, That the department shall present a proposal to the legislature no
later than December 1, 1986, that provides for the elimination of all state
funding for the program after June 30, 1989;

(4) To encourage and
promote the sale of Washington's agricultural commodities and products at the
site of their production through the development and dissemination of referral
maps and other means;

(5) To encourage and
promote those agricultural industries, such as the wine industry, which attract
visitors to rural areas in which other agricultural commodities and products
are produced and are, or could be, made available for sale;

(6) To encourage and
promote the establishment and use of public markets in this state for the sale
of Washington's agricultural products;

(7) To maintain close
contact with foreign firms and governmental agencies and to act as an effective
intermediary between foreign nations and Washington traders;

(8) To publish and
disseminate to interested citizens and others information which will aid in
carrying out the purposes of chapters 43.23, 15.64, 15.65, and 15.66 RCW;

(9) To encourage and
promote the movement of foreign and domestic agricultural goods through the
ports of Washington;

(10) To conduct an
active program by sending representatives to, or engaging representatives in,
foreign countries to promote the state's agricultural commodities and products;

(11) To assist and to
make Washington agricultural concerns more aware of the potentials of foreign
trade and to encourage production of those commodities that will have high
export potential and appeal;

(12) To coordinate the
trade promotional activities of appropriate federal, state, and local public
agencies, as well as civic organizations; ((and))

(13) To colocate,
where feasible, state trade offices or offices of foreign representative
contractors with comparable offices of states or Canadian provinces that are
members of the Pacific Northwest economic region, as defined in chapter 43.147
RCW; and

(14) To develop
a coordinated marketing program with the department of community, trade, and
economic development, utilizing existing trade offices and participating in
mutual trade missions and activities.

As used in this
section, "agricultural commodities" includes products of both
terrestrial and aquatic farming.

Sec. 4. RCW 43.31.145 and 1991 c
24 s 7 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) The
department is charged with the primary role within state government for the
establishment and operation of foreign offices or offices of foreign
representative contractors created for the purpose of promoting overseas
trade and commerce.

(2) The
department shall colocate, where feasible, state foreign offices or offices of
foreign representative contractors with comparable offices of states or
Canadian provinces that are members of the Pacific Northwest economic region,
as defined in chapter 43.147 RCW.

---
END ---