BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF
WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec.
1. The legislature finds
that the recent state supreme court decision in Simpson Investment Co. v.
Dept. of Revenue could lead to an unusually restrictive, narrow
interpretation of the deductibility of investment income for business and
occupation tax purposes. If allowed to stand, this interpretation could be
extremely detrimental.

Through its ruling, the
court called into question the application of the state's business and
occupation tax to investment income derived by nonfinancial businesses such as
family investment vehicles, estate planning entities, personal holding
companies, mutual funds, venture capital companies, and other similar entities
that have traditionally deducted their investment income pursuant to RCW
82.04.4281. The court's decision could also be read to expand the business and
occupation tax to individual citizens' investment earnings even though they
have never been considered to be engaging in business.

The court's decision
has the potential of discouraging capital investment in this state's businesses
and inhibiting individual citizens, their families, and noncommercial investors
from preserving or increasing their financial security. The legislature
recognizes that capital and investment income is easily moved out of state.
Interpretations that would apply the business and occupation tax to certain
investment income will definitely cause a reduction of overall capital available
to businesses and could cause some to take their operations and family-wage
jobs out of this state.

The legislature finds
that a narrow interpretation of RCW 82.04.4281 is clearly not in the best
interest of this state or its citizens. Therefore, it is the intent of this
act to clarify the deductibility of investment income and to specifically
identify persons who may not take the deduction provided in RCW 82.04.4281.

Sec. 2. RCW 82.04.4281 and 1980
c 37 s 2 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) In computing
tax there may be deducted from the measure of tax:

(a) Amounts
derived ((by persons, other than those engaging in banking, loan, security,
or other financial businesses,)) from investments or the use of money ((as
such, and also)) from investments;

(b) Amounts
derived as dividends by a parent from its subsidiary corporations.

(2) The following
persons are not entitled to the deduction provided in subsection (1)(a) of this
section:

(a) Persons holding
themselves out to the public and engaging in business as a banking, loan, or
other financial institution chartered under:

(i) Title 30, 31,
32, or 33 RCW;

(ii) The national
bank act, as amended;

(iii) The homeowners
loan act, as amended; or

(iv) The federal
credit union act, as amended;

(b) A holding
company of any person described in (a) of this subsection that is subject to:

(i) The bank holding
company act, as amended; or

(ii) The homeowners
loan act, as amended;

(c) Persons holding
themselves out to the public and engaging in business as a subsidiary or
affiliate owned or controlled by one or more persons described in (a) of this
subsection;

(d) Persons holding
themselves out to the public and engaging in business as a lender approved by
the United States secretary of housing and urban development for participation
in any mortgage insurance program under the national housing act, as amended;

(e) Persons holding
themselves out to the public and engaging in business as an underwriter and
distributor of securities issued by other persons, a seller of securities to
the public, a broker of securities, or any combination of these activities,
whose gross income is normally derived principally from these activities.
However, this subsection shall not be construed to include the entity which
issues any of the securities that are underwritten, distributed, sold, or
brokered by any of the persons identified in this subsection. In addition,
this subsection shall not be construed to include any collective investment
entity such as a mutual fund, venture capital fund, hedge fund, or deferred
compensation trust or account;

(f) Persons engaging
in business as a provider of revolving credit accounts, but only to the extent
of the interest income derived from the provision of the revolving credit
accounts;

(g) Persons engaging
in business as a provider of installment sales contracts, but only to the
extent of the interest income derived from the provision of the installment
sales contracts. However, a person providing installment sales contracts shall
not be deemed to be engaging in business for the purposes of this subsection
unless they hold three or more installment sales contracts;

(h)
Persons whose primary business is holding themselves out to the public and
engaging in business in substantially identical activities as any person listed
in (a) through (g) of this subsection. However, this subsection shall not be
construed to include any person who qualifies as a personal holding company as
defined in section 542 of the internal revenue code, or any person who would
meet the definition of a personal holding company if that person was a
corporation.

---
END ---