BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF
WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec.
1. (1) The legislature finds
that:

(a) Persons engaging in
business in multiple local jurisdictions face inconsistent, complicated, and
burdensome systems of local gross receipts taxation;

(b) In some instances,
the same gross income may be taxed by more than one local jurisdiction
resulting in unacceptable double taxation; and

(c) While cities need
flexibility and choices in the method of taxation they employ to support their
public services, that flexibility and choice must not inhibit a person's right
to expect predictability and ease of administration from a gross receipts tax
system that relies so heavily on voluntary compliance.

(2) It is the intent of
the legislature to produce a system of gross receipts taxation by cities that:

(a) Strives for uniform
and consistent treatment of taxpayers through the creation of a model ordinance
that reflects the basic framework of the state system of gross receipts;

(b) Prevents multiple
taxation of the same gross income;

(c) Provides taxpayers
with certainty in the determination of their gross receipts tax liability; and

(d) Allows for fair
division of gross income of businesses between and among local jurisdictions.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
2. The definitions in this
section apply throughout this chapter unless the context clearly requires
otherwise.

(1)
"Business" has the same meaning as provided in RCW 82.04.140.

(2) "City"
means a first class city as defined in RCW 35.01.010, a second class city as
defined in RCW 35.01.020, or a town as defined in RCW 35.01.040.

(3) "Engaging in
business" has the same meaning as provided in RCW 82.04.150.

(4) "Gross
income" means the gross income of the business as defined in RCW
82.04.080.

(5) "Gross
receipts tax" means a tax that is imposed on or measured by the gross
volume of business, in terms of gross income or in other terms, and in the
determination of which the deductions allowed would not constitute an income
tax or value added tax and which is also not, pursuant to law or custom,
separately stated from the sales price.

(6) "Local
jurisdiction" means any city, town, county, municipal district or
corporation, political subdivision, Indian reservation, or federal area located
in the state of Washington.

(7) "Tax
year" means either the calendar year, or if given the permission of the
city, the taxpayer's fiscal year may be used in lieu of the calendar year.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
3. (1) A city may levy and
collect from every person a tax for the act or privilege of engaging in
business activity within the geographical boundaries of the city. The tax
shall be measured by the application of rates against the gross income of the
business.

(2) The taxes authorized
under this section shall be imposed at a single uniform rate upon all persons
engaging in the same business activity.

(3) If a city levies
the tax under subsection (1) of this section, it may not impose any other tax
or fee for the privilege of engaging in business upon the same business
activity. However, this subsection is not intended to limit a city's ability
to impose fees or licenses on a business for strictly regulatory purposes.

(4) In levying the tax
authorized under this section, all state and federal constitutional provisions
and laws pertaining to the taxation of interstate commerce shall be duly
applicable to the taxation of intrastate commerce including, but not limited
to, apportioning or allocating gross income when a person is engaged in
business both within and without a local jurisdiction, establishing nexus for
purposes of determining the application of a local jurisdiction's taxes, and
providing a multiple activities tax credit similar to that provided in RCW
82.04.440.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
4. (1) Subject to the
limitations contained in this section, a city imposing a tax authorized under
section 3 of this act has the sole authority to set the rate of tax on any
particular business activity.

(2) Unless otherwise
specifically provided for by law, a city may not impose a tax under section 3
of this act at a rate that exceeds two-tenths of one percent.

(3) If a city imposed a
tax on gross receipts allowed in section 3 of this act prior to January 1,
2002, at a rate in excess of those allowed in subsection (2) of this section,
it may continue to apply those same rates after the effective date of this
act. However, any increase in a rate after December 31, 2001, is subject to
the provisions of subsection (6) of this section.

(4) A city first
imposing the gross receipts tax provided for in section 3 of this act may do so
only if:

(a) The gross receipts
tax is authorized by a proposition approved by a majority of the qualified
voters of the city at a general election held within the city or at a special
election called by the city for the purpose of submitting the proposition to
the voters; and

(b) The initial tax
rate does not exceed thirty percent of the limits set forth in subsection (2)
of this section.

(5) A city may impose
rates in excess of those provided for in subsection (2) of this section only
upon the approval of a majority of the qualified voters of the city at a
general election held within the city or at a special election called by the
city for the purpose of submitting the proposition to the voters.

(6) A city may increase
the rate of a tax authorized under section 3 of this act only upon the approval
of a majority of the qualified voters of the city at a general election held
within the city or at a special election called by the city for the purpose of
submitting the proposition to the voters. In addition, the rate of a tax may
not be increased by more than ten percent of the rate in effect as of the date
of the submittal of the proposal to the people.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
5. (1) The director of the
department of revenue shall appoint a special committee consisting of tax
administrators from a representative sampling of cities that currently apply a
gross receipts tax under section 3 of this act. The director shall ensure that
the members of the special committee are balanced between small, medium, and
large cities and shall seek nominations for the special committee from the
largest statewide association representing cities. A representative of the
cities shall serve as chair of the special committee.

(2) The special
committee established in subsection (1) of this section shall, by September 1,
2001, develop a model resolution and ordinance regarding the prospective
implementation of local gross receipts taxes. To the extent possible, the
special committee shall seek the advice of businesses affected by gross
receipts taxes during the development of the model resolution and ordinance.

(3) To ensure ease of
administration and compliance, the special committee created under subsection
(1) of this section shall, with respect to definitions and classifications,
draft a model ordinance and any updates that are substantially similar to those
provided for the state's gross receipts taxes. However, the model ordinance
and any updates may provide for deviations from the state's gross receipts tax
provisions, but shall only do so with regard to deductions, credits, or
exemptions.

(4) Upon completion of
a model resolution and ordinance by the special committee, the department of
revenue shall, by rule, propose the formal adoption of the model ordinance in
conformance with chapter 34.05 RCW.

(5) Each year following
the initial adoption of the model ordinance, the department of revenue shall
reconvene a special committee using the same criteria as provided in subsection
(1) of this section. The special committee shall review any changes to the
state's gross receipts taxes and update the model ordinance to:

(a) Incorporate the
changes made to the state's gross receipts taxes into the model ordinance;

(b) Amend the model
ordinance to address, in a different manner, the substance of the changes made
to the state's gross receipts taxes;

(c) Reject the changes
made to the state's gross receipts taxes related to deductions, credits, or
exemptions; or

(d) Perform a
combination of the actions provided for in (a), (b), or (c) of this subsection.

(6) By January 1, 2002,
any city levying a gross receipts tax under section 3 of this act must either:

(a) Adopt the model
resolution and ordinance and all updates adopted under subsection (5) of this
section; or

(b) Adopt and follow
all statutory and regulatory provisions in existence for the state's gross
receipts taxes.

(7) A city taking
either of the actions allowed in subsection (6) of this section may on January
1st of any subsequent year choose the alternative action allowed in subsection
(6) of this section.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
6. For the purposes of
applying penalties or interest upon a taxpayer subject to the tax in section 3
of this act or granting a waiver or cancellation of such penalties or interest,
a city must apply penalties and interest and grant waivers and cancellations in
the same manner as provided to the department of revenue in chapter 82.32 RCW.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
7. (1) For the purposes of
determining and administering an assessment or correction of an assessment for additional
gross receipts taxes, penalties or interest due upon a taxpayer subject to the
tax in section 3 of this act, a city must calculate and administer the
assessment or correction of an assessment in the same manner as provided to the
department of revenue in chapter 82.32 RCW.

(2) For the purposes of
determining and administering any refund or credit for gross receipts taxes,
penalties, or interest for a taxpayer subject to the tax in section 3 of this
act, a city must calculate and administer the refund or credit in the same
manner as provided to the department of revenue in chapter 82.32 RCW.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
8. (1) For the purposes of
apportioning or allocating gross income for gross receipts taxes authorized
under section 3 of this act, the total tax measure apportioned or allocated to
applicable local jurisdictions shall not exceed the total tax measure computed
for the purpose of state gross receipts taxation.

(2) The following
specific guidelines shall be applied by any city that imposes a gross receipts
tax under section 3 of this act:

(a) For the purposes of
imposing a gross receipts tax on extracting, manufacturing, or processing for
hire activities, the activities are subject to tax in the local jurisdiction
where the activities occur. If the activities occur in more than one local
jurisdiction, the activities are consistently, equitably, and reasonably
apportioned between or among those local jurisdictions even though the taxpayer
may not have an office or other permanent place of business in each
jurisdiction.

(b) For the purposes of
imposing a gross receipts tax on retail or wholesale sales, all sales are
subject to tax in the local jurisdiction where the sales occur. The provisions
of RCW 82.14.020 are to be followed in determining where a sale occurs.

(c) For the purposes of
imposing a gross receipts tax on any person rendering services, other than
services defined as a retail sale under RCW 82.04.050, the services are subject
to tax in the local jurisdiction where the services were primarily performed.
If the person rendering services performs substantial service activities in
more than one local jurisdiction, the person shall apportion to each local
jurisdiction that portion of the total gross income that is derived from
services rendered in each local jurisdiction. Where apportionment cannot be
accurately made by separate accounting methods, the person shall apportion to
each local jurisdiction that proportion of the total gross income which is derived
from services which the cost of performing the services within a local
jurisdiction bears to the total cost of performing the services in all local
jurisdictions. The city shall apportion the gross receipts derived from
services even though the taxpayer may not have an office or other permanent
place of business in each jurisdiction where it performs the services.

(3) The following
credits are allowed for persons performing multiple activities in multiple
local jurisdictions:

(a) Every person
engaged in manufacturing activities is allowed a credit against the measure of
tax of any manufacturing gross receipts tax imposed by a local jurisdiction for
any portion of the measure of tax which has been previously subjected to a
local jurisdiction gross receipts tax on either extracting or previously
performed manufacturing activities.

(b) Every person
engaged in making retail or wholesale sales is allowed a credit against the
measure of tax of any retailing or wholesaling gross receipts tax imposed by a
local jurisdiction for any portion of the measure of tax which has been
previously subjected to a local jurisdiction gross receipts tax on either
extracting or manufacturing activities.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
9. The following acts or
parts of acts are each repealed:

(1) RCW 35.21.706 (Imposition or increase of
business and occupation tax--Referendum procedure required--Exclusive
procedure) and 1983 c 99 s 6;

(2) RCW 35.21.710 (License fees or taxes on
certain business activities--Uniform rate required--Maximum rate established)
and 1983 2nd ex.s. c 3 s 33, 1983 c 99 s 7, 1982 1st ex.s. c 49 s 7, 1981 c 144
s 6, & 1972 ex.s. c 134 s 6; and

(3) RCW 35.21.711 (License fees or taxes on
certain business activities--Excess rates authorized by voters) and 1982 1st
ex.s. c 49 s 8.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 10. Sections 1 through 8 of
this act constitute a new chapter in Title 35 RCW.

---
END ---