BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF
WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1. RCW 66.24.425 and 1998 c
126 s 7 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) The board may, in
its discretion, issue a spirits, beer, and wine restaurant license to a
business which qualifies as a "restaurant" as that term is defined in
RCW 66.24.410 in all respects except that the business does not serve the
general public but, through membership qualification, selectively restricts
admission to the business. For purposes of RCW 66.24.400 and 66.24.420, all
licenses issued under this section shall be considered spirits, beer, and wine
restaurant licenses and shall be subject to all requirements, fees, and
qualifications in this title, or in rules adopted by the board, as are
applicable to spirits, beer, and wine restaurant licenses generally except that
no service to the general public may be required.

(2) No license shall be
issued under this section to a business:

(a) Which shall not
have been in continuous operation for at least one year immediately prior to
the date of its application; or

(b) Which denies
membership or admission to any person because of race, creed, color, national
origin, sex, or the presence of any sensory, mental, or physical handicap.

(3) The
board may issue an endorsement to the spirits, beer, and wine restaurant
license issued under this section that allows up to forty nonclub,
member-sponsored events using club liquor. Visitors and guests may attend
these events only by invitation of the sponsoring member or members. These
events may not be open to the general public. The fee for the endorsement is
an annual fee of nine hundred dollars. Upon the board's request, the holder of
the endorsement must provide the board or the board's designee with the
following information at least seventy-two hours before the event: The date, time,
and location of the event; the name of the sponsor of the event; and a brief
description of the purpose of the event.

--- END ---