BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF
WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec.
1. A new section is added
to chapter 10.101 RCW to read as follows:

(1) Subject to
legislative appropriation, quarterly an amount equivalent to one hundred
dollars for each case for which an indigent person is provided public defense
services for a criminal matter in the previous fiscal quarter statewide shall
be transferred from the general fund to the criminal public defense account, to
be administered by the director of the office of public defense.

(2) In carrying out the
purposes of this section, all counties of the state are eligible to participate
in the distribution of the proceeds of the criminal public defense account.
The share coming to each county shall be an amount equivalent to one hundred
dollars for each case for which an indigent person is provided public defense
services for a criminal matter at the expense of that county. Moneys
distributed under this section may only be used by counties for public defense
services.

(3) The
criminal public defense account is created in the custody of the state
treasurer. All receipts from transfers or appropriations must be deposited
into the account. Expenditures from the account may be used only for
reimbursement to counties for public defense services provided at county
expense. Only the director of the office of public defense established in
chapter 2.70 RCW or the director's designee may authorize expenditures from the
account. The account is subject to allotment procedures under chapter 43.88
RCW, but an appropriation is not required for expenditures.

--- END ---