BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF
WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1. RCW 18.106.010 and 1997
c 326 s 2 are each amended to read as follows:

Unless a different
meaning is plainly required by the context, the following words and phrases as
hereinafter used in this chapter shall have the following meaning:

(1) "Advisory board"
means the state advisory board of plumbers;

(2)
"Department" means the department of labor and industries;

(3)
"Director" means the director of department of labor and industries;

(4) "Journeyman
plumber" means any person who has been issued a certificate of competency
by the department of labor and industries as provided in this chapter;

(5) "Medical gas
piping" means oxygen, nitrous oxide, high pressure nitrogen, medical
compressed air, and medical vacuum systems;

(6) "Medical gas
piping installer" means a journeyman plumber who has been issued a medical
gas piping installer endorsement;

(7)
"Plumbing" means that craft involved in installing, altering,
repairing and renovating potable water systems, liquid waste systems, and
medical gas piping systems within a building. Installation in a water system
of water softening or water treatment equipment is not within the meaning of
plumbing as used in this chapter;

(8) "Specialty
plumber" means anyone who has been issued a specialty certificate of competency
limited to:

(a) Installation,
maintenance, and repair of the plumbing of single-family dwellings, duplexes,
and apartment buildings that do not exceed three stories;

(b) In-line
maintenance and repair of backflow prevention assemblies within buildings; or

(c) Other plumbing
as determined by the department, with the advice of the advisory board.

Sec. 2. RCW 18.106.040 and 1977
ex.s. c 149 s 4 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) Upon receipt
of the application and evidence set forth in RCW 18.106.030, the director shall
review the same and make a determination as to whether the applicant is
eligible to take an examination for the certificate of competency. To be
eligible to take the examination:

(a) Each
applicant for a journeyman plumber's certificate of competency shall furnish
written evidence that he or she:

(i) Has ((either))
completed a course of study in the plumbing trade in the armed services of the
United States or at a school accredited by the coordinating council on
occupational education; or ((that he))

(ii) Has had
four or more years of experience under the direct supervision of a licensed
journeyman plumber.

(b) Each
applicant for a specialty plumber's certificate of competency shall furnish
written evidence that he or she:

(i) Has ((either))
completed a course of study in the plumbing trade in the armed services of the
United States ((or at a school accredited by the commission for vocational
education or its designee, or that he));

(ii) Has had at
least three years practical experience in ((his)) the specialty;
or

(iii) Meets other
requirements of eligibility as determined by the department, with the advice of
the advisory board.

(c) Each applicant
for a backflow prevention assembly repair specialty plumber's certificate of
competency shall furnish written evidence that he or she:

(i) Is certified as
a backflow assembly tester by the department of health; and

(ii) Meets other
requirements of eligibility as determined by the department, with the advice of
the advisory board.

(2) No other
requirement for eligibility may be imposed.

(3) The director
shall establish reasonable rules and regulations for the examinations to be
given applicants for certificates of competency. In establishing said rules,
regulations, and criteria, the director shall consult with the state advisory
board of plumbers as established in RCW 18.106.110.

(4) Upon
determination that the applicant is eligible to take the examination, the
director shall so notify ((him)) the applicant, indicating the
time and place for taking the same.

Sec. 3. RCW 18.106.050 and 1997
c 326 s 5 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) The department
may establish, with the advice of the advisory board, certificates of
competency for specialty plumbers.

(2) The
department, with the advice of the advisory board, shall prepare a written
examination to be administered to applicants for certificates of competency for
journeyman plumber and specialty plumber. The examination shall be constructed
to determine:

(a) Whether the
applicant possesses varied general knowledge of the technical information and
practical procedures that are identified with the trade of journeyman plumber
or specialty plumber; and

(b) Whether the
applicant is familiar with the applicable plumbing codes and the administrative
rules of the department pertaining to plumbing and plumbers.

(3) The
department shall administer the examination to eligible persons. All
applicants shall, before taking the examination, pay to the department a fee.

(((2))) (4)
For purposes of the medical gas piping installer endorsement, the department
may enter into a contract with a nationally recognized testing agency to
develop, administer, and score medical gas piping installer examinations. All
applicants shall, before taking an examination for a medical gas piping
installer endorsement, pay the required examination fee. The department shall
set the examination fee by contract with a nationally recognized testing
agency. The fee shall cover but not exceed the costs of preparing and
administering the examination and the materials necessary to conduct the
practical elements of the examination. The department shall approve training
courses and set the fees for training courses for the medical gas piping
installer endorsement.

The
department shall certify the results of the examination, and shall notify the
applicant in writing whether he or she has passed or failed. Any applicant who
has failed the examination may retake the examination, upon the terms and after
a period of time that the director shall set by rule. The director may not
limit the number of times that a person may take the examination.

Sec. 4. RCW 18.27.070 and 1997 c
314 s 7 are each amended to read as follows:

The department shall
charge fees for issuance, renewal, and reinstatement of certificates of
registration; and changes of name, address, or business structure. The
department shall set the fees by rule.

Except as provided
in RCW 18.106.130, the entire amount of the fees are to be used solely to
cover the full cost of issuing certificates, filing papers and notices, and
administering and enforcing this chapter. The costs shall include
reproduction, travel, per diem, and administrative and legal support costs.

Sec. 5. RCW 18.106.125 and 1983
c 124 s 17 are each amended to read as follows:

The department shall
charge fees for issuance, renewal, and reinstatement of all certificates and
permits and for examinations required by this chapter. The department shall
set the fees by rule.

The fees charged
under this section and the fees charged for certificates of registration for
specialty plumbing contractors under chapter 18.27 RCW shall cover the full
cost of issuing the certificates and permits, devising and administering the
examinations, and administering and enforcing this chapter. The costs shall
include travel, per diem, and administrative support costs.

Sec. 6. RCW 18.106.130 and 1973
1st ex.s. c 175 s 13 are each amended to read as follows:

All moneys
received from certificates of competency, permits, or other sources((,))
under this chapter and from certificates of registration for specialty
plumbing contractors under chapter 18.27 RCW shall be paid to the state
treasurer as ex officio custodian thereof and ((by him)) placed in a
special fund designated as the "plumbing certificate fund". ((He))
The treasurer shall pay out upon vouchers duly and regularly issued
therefor and approved by the director. The treasurer shall keep an accurate
record of payments into ((said)) the fund, and of all
disbursement therefrom. ((Said)) The fund shall be charged with
its pro rata share of the cost of administering ((said)) the
fund.

---
END ---