BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF
WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec.
1. The legislature finds
that:

(1) The state is
experiencing dramatic increases in the costs of electricity and natural gas,
with increases averaging between thirty and seventy percent, as a result of
many factors out of the state's direct control.

(2) These unprecedented
price increases have a disproportionate impact on the low-income citizens of
the state because energy costs comprise a larger percentage of their available
resources than families with moderate and higher incomes and approximately
seventy-five percent of low-income homes use electric heat.

(3) Every year, the
state's low-income energy assistance program exhausts its resources before the
end of the heating season. Typically, only seventeen percent of the eligible
population is served in an average year.

(4) Requests for
assistance are expected to increase by over forty percent this winter, and the
amount of heating assistance each household will need will also rise.

(5) While the state has
received emergency allocations from the federal government, the combined
circumstances of increased need for help and the increased cost of energy make
it likely that, even with the emergency federal assistance, fewer citizens will
be served.

The legislature
therefore intends to provide immediate assistance to help mitigate the adverse
consequences of this winter's rate increases on Washington's low-income
citizens.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
2. The sum of two million
dollars, or as much thereof as may be necessary, is appropriated from the
general fund to the department of community, trade, and economic development
for the fiscal year ending June 30, 2001, for the low-income home energy
assistance program.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 3. This act is necessary for
the immediate preservation of the public peace, health, or safety, or support
of the state government and its existing public institutions, and takes effect
immediately.

---
END ---