BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF
WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec.
1. A court organized and
operating under this title may not impose any additional policy or fiscal
responsibilities for new programs or increased levels of service under existing
programs on any political subdivision of the state unless the court is
expressly authorized or required to do so by law and the court finds that under
existing funding mechanisms the subdivision is currently fully budgeted for or
will be fully reimbursed by the state for the costs of the new programs or
increases in service levels.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
2. A court organized and
operating under this title may not impose any additional policy or fiscal
responsibilities for new programs or increased levels of service under existing
programs on any political subdivision of the state unless the court is
expressly authorized or required to do so by law and the court finds that under
existing funding mechanisms the subdivision is currently fully budgeted for or
will be fully reimbursed by the state for the costs of the new programs or
increases in service levels.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
3. A court organized and
operating under this title may not impose any additional policy or fiscal
responsibilities for new programs or increased levels of service under existing
programs on any political subdivision of the state unless the court is
expressly authorized or required to do so by law and the court finds that under
existing funding mechanisms the subdivision is currently fully budgeted for or
will be fully reimbursed by the state for the costs of the new programs or
increases in service levels.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
4. A court organized and
operating under this title may not impose any additional policy or fiscal
responsibilities for new programs or increased levels of service under existing
programs on any political subdivision of the state unless the court is
expressly authorized or required to do so by law and the court finds that under
existing funding mechanisms the subdivision is currently fully budgeted for or
will be fully reimbursed by the state for the costs of the new programs or
increases in service levels.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
5. Section 1 of this act
constitutes a new chapter in Title 2 RCW.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
6. Section 2 of this act
constitutes a new chapter in Title 3 RCW.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
7. Section 3 of this act
constitutes a new chapter in Title 35 RCW.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
8. Section 4 of this act
constitutes a new chapter in Title 35A RCW.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 9. If any provision of this
act or its application to any person or circumstance is held invalid, the
remainder of the act or the application of the provision to other persons or
circumstances is not affected.

---
END ---