BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF
WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec.
1. The legislature finds and
declares that substance abuse treatment is a proven public safety and health
measure. Nonviolent, drug-dependent criminal offenders who receive chemical
dependency treatment are much less likely to abuse drugs and commit future
crimes, and are more likely to live healthier, more stable, and more productive
lives.

This act is intended to
reduce sentences and eliminate triple and double scoring in order to create
savings to provide treatment for drug-dependent criminal offenders.

Sec. 2. RCW 9.94A.320 and 2000 c
225 s 5, 2000 c 119 s 17, and 2000 c 66 s 2 are each reenacted and amended to
read as follows:

TABLE
2

CRIMES
INCLUDED WITHIN EACH SERIOUSNESS LEVEL

XVIAggravated
Murder 1 (RCW 10.95.020)

XVHomicide
by abuse (RCW 9A.32.055)

Malicious
explosion 1 (RCW 70.74.280(1))

Murder
1 (RCW 9A.32.030)

XIVMurder
2 (RCW 9A.32.050)

XIIIMalicious
explosion 2 (RCW 70.74.280(2))

Malicious
placement of an explosive 1 (RCW 70.74.270(1))

XIIAssault
1 (RCW 9A.36.011)

Assault
of a Child 1 (RCW 9A.36.120)

Malicious
placement of an imitation device 1 (RCW 70.74.272(1)(a))

Rape
1 (RCW 9A.44.040)

Rape
of a Child 1 (RCW 9A.44.073)

XIManslaughter
1 (RCW 9A.32.060)

Rape
2 (RCW 9A.44.050)

Rape
of a Child 2 (RCW 9A.44.076)

XChild
Molestation 1 (RCW 9A.44.083)

Indecent
Liberties (with forcible compulsion) (RCW 9A.44.100(1)(a))

Kidnapping
1 (RCW 9A.40.020)

Leading
Organized Crime (RCW 9A.82.060(1)(a))

Malicious
explosion 3 (RCW 70.74.280(3))

Manufacture
of methamphetamine (RCW 69.50.401(a)(1)(ii))

Over
18 and deliver heroin, methamphetamine, a narcotic from Schedule I or II, or
flunitrazepam from Schedule IV to someone under 18 (RCW 69.50.406)

IXAssault
of a Child 2 (RCW 9A.36.130)

Controlled
Substance Homicide (RCW 69.50.415)

Explosive
devices prohibited (RCW 70.74.180)

Homicide
by Watercraft, by being under the influence of intoxicating liquor or any drug
(RCW 79A.60.050)

Inciting
Criminal Profiteering (RCW 9A.82.060(1)(b))

Malicious
placement of an explosive 2 (RCW 70.74.270(2))

Over
18 and deliver narcotic from Schedule III, IV, or V or a nonnarcotic, except
flunitrazepam or methamphetamine, from Schedule I-V to someone under 18 and 3
years junior (RCW 69.50.406)

Robbery
1 (RCW 9A.56.200)

Sexual
Exploitation (RCW 9.68A.040)

Vehicular
Homicide, by being under the influence of intoxicating liquor or any drug (RCW
46.61.520)

VIIIArson
1 (RCW 9A.48.020)

Deliver
or possess with intent to deliver methamphetamine (RCW 69.50.401(a)(1)(ii))

Hit
and Run‑-Death (RCW 46.52.020(4)(a))

Homicide
by Watercraft, by the operation of any vessel in a reckless manner (RCW
79A.60.050)

Manslaughter
2 (RCW 9A.32.070)

Manufacture,
deliver, or possess with intent to deliver amphetamine (RCW
69.50.401(a)(1)(ii))

((Manufacture,
deliver, or possess with intent to deliver heroin or cocaine (RCW
69.50.401(a)(1)(i))))

Possession
of Ephedrine, Pseudoephedrine, or Anhydrous Ammonia with intent to manufacture
methamphetamine (RCW 69.50.440)

Promoting
Prostitution 1 (RCW 9A.88.070)

((Selling
for profit (controlled or counterfeit) any controlled substance (RCW 69.50.410)))

Theft
of Anhydrous Ammonia (RCW 69.55.010)

Vehicular
Homicide, by the operation of any vehicle in a reckless manner (RCW 46.61.520)

VIIBurglary
1 (RCW 9A.52.020)

Child
Molestation 2 (RCW 9A.44.086)

Dealing
in depictions of minor engaged in sexually explicit conduct (RCW 9.68A.050)

Drive-by
Shooting (RCW 9A.36.045)

Homicide
by Watercraft, by disregard for the safety of others (RCW 79A.60.050)

Indecent
Liberties (without forcible compulsion) (RCW 9A.44.100(1) (b) and (c))

Introducing
Contraband 1 (RCW 9A.76.140)

Involving
a minor in drug dealing (RCW 69.50.401(f))

Malicious
placement of an explosive 3 (RCW 70.74.270(3))

Manufacture,
deliver, or possess with intent to deliver heroin or cocaine (RCW
69.50.401(a)(1)(i))

Selling
for profit (controlled or counterfeit) any controlled substance (RCW 69.50.410)

Sending,
bringing into state depictions of minor engaged in sexually explicit conduct
(RCW 9.68A.060)

Unlawful
Possession of a Firearm in the first degree (RCW 9.41.040(1)(a))

Use
of a Machine Gun in Commission of a Felony (RCW 9.41.225)

Vehicular
Homicide, by disregard for the safety of others (RCW 46.61.520)

VIBail
Jumping with Murder 1 (RCW 9A.76.170(2)(a))

Bribery
(RCW 9A.68.010)

Incest
1 (RCW 9A.64.020(1))

Intimidating
a Judge (RCW 9A.72.160)

Intimidating
a Juror/Witness (RCW 9A.72.110, 9A.72.130)

Malicious
placement of an imitation device 2 (RCW 70.74.272(1)(b))

Manufacture,
deliver, or possess with intent to deliver narcotics from Schedule I or II
(except heroin or cocaine) or flunitrazepam from Schedule IV (RCW
69.50.401(a)(1)(i))

Rape
of a Child 3 (RCW 9A.44.079)

Theft
of a Firearm (RCW 9A.56.300)

Unlawful
Storage of Anhydrous Ammonia (RCW 69.55.020)

VAbandonment
of dependent person 1 (RCW 9A.42.060)

Advancing
money or property for extortionate extension of credit (RCW 9A.82.030)

Bail
Jumping with class A Felony (RCW 9A.76.170(2)(b))

Child
Molestation 3 (RCW 9A.44.089)

Criminal
Mistreatment 1 (RCW 9A.42.020)

Custodial
Sexual Misconduct 1 (RCW 9A.44.160)

Delivery
of imitation controlled substance by person eighteen or over to person under
eighteen (RCW 69.52.030(2))

Domestic
Violence Court Order Violation (RCW 10.99.040, 10.99.050, 26.09.300, 26.10.220,
26.26.138, 26.50.110, 26.52.070, or 74.34.145)

Extortion
1 (RCW 9A.56.120)

Extortionate
Extension of Credit (RCW 9A.82.020)

Extortionate
Means to Collect Extensions of Credit (RCW 9A.82.040)

Incest
2 (RCW 9A.64.020(2))

Kidnapping
2 (RCW 9A.40.030)

Perjury
1 (RCW 9A.72.020)

Persistent
prison misbehavior (RCW 9.94.070)

Possession
of a Stolen Firearm (RCW 9A.56.310)

Rape
3 (RCW 9A.44.060)

Rendering
Criminal Assistance 1 (RCW 9A.76.070)

Sexual
Misconduct with a Minor 1 (RCW 9A.44.093)

Sexually
Violating Human Remains (RCW 9A.44.105)

Stalking
(RCW 9A.46.110)

IVArson
2 (RCW 9A.48.030)

Assault
2 (RCW 9A.36.021)

Assault
by Watercraft (RCW 79A.60.060)

Bribing
a Witness/Bribe Received by Witness (RCW 9A.72.090, 9A.72.100)

Commercial
Bribery (RCW 9A.68.060)

Counterfeiting
(RCW 9.16.035(4))

Escape
1 (RCW 9A.76.110)

Hit
and Run‑-Injury (RCW 46.52.020(4)(b))

Hit
and Run with Vessel‑-Injury Accident (RCW 79A.60.200(3))

Indecent
Exposure to Person Under Age Fourteen (subsequent sex offense) (RCW 9A.88.010)

Influencing
Outcome of Sporting Event (RCW 9A.82.070)

Knowingly
Trafficking in Stolen Property (RCW 9A.82.050(2))

Malicious
Harassment (RCW 9A.36.080)

Manufacture,
deliver, or possess with intent to deliver narcotics from Schedule III, IV, or
V or nonnarcotics from Schedule I-V (except marijuana, amphetamine,
methamphetamines, or flunitrazepam) (RCW 69.50.401(a)(1) (iii) through (v))

Residential
Burglary (RCW 9A.52.025)

Robbery
2 (RCW 9A.56.210)

Theft
of Livestock 1 (RCW 9A.56.080)

Threats
to Bomb (RCW 9.61.160)

Use
of Proceeds of Criminal Profiteering (RCW 9A.82.080 (1) and (2))

Vehicular
Assault (RCW 46.61.522)

Willful
Failure to Return from Furlough (RCW 72.66.060)

IIIAbandonment
of dependent person 2 (RCW 9A.42.070)

Assault
3 (RCW 9A.36.031)

Assault
of a Child 3 (RCW 9A.36.140)

Bail
Jumping with class B or C Felony (RCW 9A.76.170(2)(c))

Burglary
2 (RCW 9A.52.030)

Communication
with a Minor for Immoral Purposes (RCW 9.68A.090)

Criminal
Gang Intimidation (RCW 9A.46.120)

Criminal
Mistreatment 2 (RCW 9A.42.030)

Custodial
Assault (RCW 9A.36.100)

Delivery
of a material in lieu of a controlled substance (RCW 69.50.401(c))

Escape
2 (RCW 9A.76.120)

Extortion
2 (RCW 9A.56.130)

Harassment
(RCW 9A.46.020)

Intimidating
a Public Servant (RCW 9A.76.180)

Introducing
Contraband 2 (RCW 9A.76.150)

Maintaining
a Dwelling or Place for Controlled Substances (RCW 69.50.402(a)(6))

Malicious
Injury to Railroad Property (RCW 81.60.070)

Manufacture,
deliver, or possess with intent to deliver marijuana (RCW 69.50.401(a)(1)(iii))

Manufacture,
distribute, or possess with intent to distribute an imitation controlled
substance (RCW 69.52.030(1))

Patronizing
a Juvenile Prostitute (RCW 9.68A.100)

Perjury
2 (RCW 9A.72.030)

Possession
of Incendiary Device (RCW 9.40.120)

Possession
of Machine Gun or Short-Barreled Shotgun or Rifle (RCW 9.41.190)

Promoting
Prostitution 2 (RCW 9A.88.080)

Recklessly
Trafficking in Stolen Property (RCW 9A.82.050(1))

Securities
Act violation (RCW 21.20.400)

Tampering
with a Witness (RCW 9A.72.120)

Telephone
Harassment (subsequent conviction or threat of death) (RCW 9.61.230)

Theft
of Livestock 2 (RCW 9A.56.080)

Unlawful
Imprisonment (RCW 9A.40.040)

Unlawful
possession of firearm in the second degree (RCW 9.41.040(1)(b))

Unlawful
Use of Building for Drug Purposes (RCW 69.53.010)

Willful
Failure to Return from Work Release (RCW 72.65.070)

IIComputer
Trespass 1 (RCW 9A.52.110)

Counterfeiting
(RCW 9.16.035(3))

Create,
deliver, or possess a counterfeit controlled substance (RCW 69.50.401(b))

Escape
from Community Custody (RCW 72.09.310)

Health
Care False Claims (RCW 48.80.030)

Malicious
Mischief 1 (RCW 9A.48.070)

Possession
of controlled substance that is either heroin or narcotics from Schedule I or
II or flunitrazepam from Schedule IV (RCW 69.50.401(d))

Possession
of phencyclidine (PCP) (RCW 69.50.401(d))

Possession
of Stolen Property 1 (RCW 9A.56.150)

Theft
1 (RCW 9A.56.030)

Theft
of Rental, Leased, or Lease-purchased Property (valued at one thousand five
hundred dollars or more) (RCW 9A.56.096(4))

Trafficking
in Insurance Claims (RCW 48.30A.015)

Unlawful
Practice of Law (RCW 2.48.180)

Unlicensed
Practice of a Profession or Business (RCW 18.130.190(7))

IAttempting
to Elude a Pursuing Police Vehicle (RCW 46.61.024)

False
Verification for Welfare (RCW 74.08.055)

Forged
Prescription (RCW 69.41.020)

Forged
Prescription for a Controlled Substance (RCW 69.50.403)

Forgery
(RCW 9A.60.020)

Malicious
Mischief 2 (RCW 9A.48.080)

Possess
Controlled Substance that is a Narcotic from Schedule III, IV, or V or
Non-narcotic from Schedule I-V (except phencyclidine or flunitrazepam) (RCW
69.50.401(d))

Possession
of Stolen Property 2 (RCW 9A.56.160)

Reckless
Burning 1 (RCW 9A.48.040)

Taking
Motor Vehicle Without Permission (RCW 9A.56.070)

Theft
2 (RCW 9A.56.040)

Theft
of Rental, Leased, or Lease-purchased Property (valued at two hundred fifty
dollars or more but less than one thousand five hundred dollars) (RCW
9A.56.096(4))

Unlawful
Issuance of Checks or Drafts (RCW 9A.56.060)

Unlawful
Use of Food Stamps (RCW 9.91.140 (2) and (3))

Vehicle
Prowl 1 (RCW 9A.52.095)

Sec. 3. RCW 9.94A.360 and 2000 c
28 s 15 are each amended to read as follows:

The offender score is
measured on the horizontal axis of the sentencing grid. The offender score
rules are as follows:

The offender score is
the sum of points accrued under this section rounded down to the nearest whole
number.

(1) A prior conviction
is a conviction which exists before the date of sentencing for the offense for
which the offender score is being computed. Convictions entered or sentenced
on the same date as the conviction for which the offender score is being
computed shall be deemed "other current offenses" within the meaning
of RCW 9.94A.400.

(2) Class A and sex
prior felony convictions shall always be included in the offender score. Class
B prior felony convictions other than sex offenses shall not be included in the
offender score, if since the last date of release from confinement (including
full-time residential treatment) pursuant to a felony conviction, if any, or
entry of judgment and sentence, the offender had spent ten consecutive years in
the community without committing any crime that subsequently results in a
conviction. Class C prior felony convictions other than sex offenses shall not
be included in the offender score if, since the last date of release from
confinement (including full-time residential treatment) pursuant to a felony
conviction, if any, or entry of judgment and sentence, the offender had spent five
consecutive years in the community without committing any crime that
subsequently results in a conviction. Serious traffic convictions shall not be
included in the offender score if, since the last date of release from
confinement (including full-time residential treatment) pursuant to a felony
conviction, if any, or entry of judgment and sentence, the offender spent five
years in the community without committing any crime that subsequently results
in a conviction. This subsection applies to both adult and juvenile prior
convictions.

(3) Out-of-state
convictions for offenses shall be classified according to the comparable
offense definitions and sentences provided by Washington law. Federal
convictions for offenses shall be classified according to the comparable
offense definitions and sentences provided by Washington law. If there is no
clearly comparable offense under Washington law or the offense is one that is
usually considered subject to exclusive federal jurisdiction, the offense shall
be scored as a class C felony equivalent if it was a felony under the relevant
federal statute.

(4) Score prior
convictions for felony anticipatory offenses (attempts, criminal solicitations,
and criminal conspiracies) the same as if they were convictions for completed
offenses.

(5)(a) In the case of
multiple prior convictions, for the purpose of computing the offender score,
count all convictions separately, except:

(i) Prior offenses
which were found, under RCW 9.94A.400(1)(a), to encompass the same criminal conduct,
shall be counted as one offense, the offense that yields the highest offender
score. The current sentencing court shall determine with respect to other
prior adult offenses for which sentences were served concurrently or prior
juvenile offenses for which sentences were served consecutively, whether those
offenses shall be counted as one offense or as separate offenses using the
"same criminal conduct" analysis found in RCW 9.94A.400(1)(a), and if
the court finds that they shall be counted as one offense, then the offense
that yields the highest offender score shall be used. The current sentencing
court may presume that such other prior offenses were not the same criminal
conduct from sentences imposed on separate dates, or in separate counties or jurisdictions,
or in separate complaints, indictments, or informations;

(ii) In the case of
multiple prior convictions for offenses committed before July 1, 1986, for the
purpose of computing the offender score, count all adult convictions served
concurrently as one offense, and count all juvenile convictions entered on the
same date as one offense. Use the conviction for the offense that yields the
highest offender score.

(b) As used in this
subsection (5), "served concurrently" means that: (i) The latter
sentence was imposed with specific reference to the former; (ii) the concurrent
relationship of the sentences was judicially imposed; and (iii) the concurrent
timing of the sentences was not the result of a probation or parole revocation
on the former offense.

(6) If the present
conviction is one of the anticipatory offenses of criminal attempt,
solicitation, or conspiracy, count each prior conviction as if the present
conviction were for a completed offense. When these convictions are used as
criminal history, score them the same as a completed crime.

(7) If the present
conviction is for a nonviolent offense and not covered by subsection (11) or (12)
of this section, count one point for each adult prior felony conviction and one
point for each juvenile prior violent felony conviction and 1/2 point for each
juvenile prior nonviolent felony conviction.

(8) If the present
conviction is for a violent offense and not covered in subsection (9), (10),
(11), or (12) of this section, count two points for each prior adult and
juvenile violent felony conviction, one point for each prior adult nonviolent
felony conviction, and 1/2 point for each prior juvenile nonviolent felony
conviction.

(9) If the present
conviction is for a serious violent offense, count three points for prior adult
and juvenile convictions for crimes in this category, two points for each prior
adult and juvenile violent conviction (not already counted), one point for each
prior adult nonviolent felony conviction, and 1/2 point for each prior juvenile
nonviolent felony conviction.

(10) If the present
conviction is for Burglary 1, count prior convictions as in subsection (8) of
this section; however count two points for each prior adult Burglary 2 or
residential burglary conviction, and one point for each prior juvenile Burglary
2 or residential burglary conviction.

(11) If the present
conviction is for a felony traffic offense count two points for each adult or
juvenile prior conviction for Vehicular Homicide or Vehicular Assault; for each
felony offense count one point for each adult and 1/2 point for each juvenile
prior conviction; for each serious traffic offense, other than those used for
an enhancement pursuant to RCW 46.61.520(2), count one point for each adult and
1/2 point for each juvenile prior conviction.

(12) If the present
conviction is for ((a drug offense)) manufacture of methamphetamine
count three points for each adult prior ((felony drug offense)) manufacture
of methamphetamine conviction and two points for each juvenile ((drug))
manufacture of methamphetamine offense. All other adult and juvenile
felonies are scored as in subsection (8) of this section if the current drug
offense is violent, or as in subsection (7) of this section if the current drug
offense is nonviolent.

(13) If the present
conviction is for Willful Failure to Return from Furlough, RCW 72.66.060,
Willful Failure to Return from Work Release, RCW 72.65.070, or Escape from
Community Custody, RCW 72.09.310, count only prior escape convictions in the
offender score. Count adult prior escape convictions as one point and juvenile
prior escape convictions as 1/2 point.

(14) If the present
conviction is for Escape 1, RCW 9A.76.110, or Escape 2, RCW 9A.76.120, count
adult prior convictions as one point and juvenile prior convictions as 1/2
point.

(15) If the present
conviction is for Burglary 2 or residential burglary, count priors as in
subsection (7) of this section; however, count two points for each adult and
juvenile prior Burglary 1 conviction, two points for each adult prior Burglary
2 or residential burglary conviction, and one point for each juvenile prior
Burglary 2 or residential burglary conviction.

(16) If the present
conviction is for a sex offense, count priors as in subsections (7) through
(15) of this section; however count three points for each adult and juvenile
prior sex offense conviction.

(17) If the present
conviction is for an offense committed while the offender was under community
placement, add one point.

Sec. 4. RCW 69.50.410 and 1999 c
324 s 6 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) Except as
authorized by this chapter it shall be unlawful for any person to sell for
profit any controlled substance or counterfeit substance classified in Schedule
I, RCW 69.50.204, except leaves and flowering tops of marihuana.

For the purposes of
this section only, the following words and phrases shall have the following
meanings:

(a) "To sell"
means the passing of title and possession of a controlled substance from the
seller to the buyer for a price whether or not the price is paid immediately or
at a future date.

(b) "For
profit" means the obtaining of anything of value in exchange for a
controlled substance.

(c) "Price"
means anything of value.

(2) Any person
convicted of a violation of subsection (1) of this section ((shall receive a
sentence of not more than five years in a correctional facility of the
department of social and health services for the first offense. Any person
convicted on a second or subsequent cause, the sale having transpired after
prosecution and conviction on the first cause, of subsection (1) of this
section shall receive a mandatory sentence of five years in a correctional
facility of the department of social and health services and no judge of any
court shall suspend or defer the sentence imposed for the second or subsequent
violation of subsection (1) of this section.

(3) Any person convicted
of a violation of subsection (1) of this section by selling heroin shall
receive a mandatory sentence of two years in a correctional facility of the
department of social and health services and no judge of any court shall
suspend or defer the sentence imposed for such violation. Any person convicted
on a second or subsequent sale of heroin, the sale having transpired after
prosecution and conviction on the first cause of the sale of heroin shall
receive a mandatory sentence of ten years in a correctional facility of the
department of social and health services and no judge of any court shall
suspend or defer the sentence imposed for this second or subsequent violation:
PROVIDED, That the indeterminate sentence review board under RCW 9.95.040 shall
not reduce the minimum term imposed for a violation under this subsection.

(4) Whether or not a
mandatory minimum term has expired,))
is guilty of a class C felony and shall be punished according to chapter
9A.20 RCW.

(3) An offender
serving a sentence under this section may be granted an extraordinary medical
placement when authorized under RCW 9.94A.150(4).

(((5))) (4)
In addition to the sentences provided in subsection (2) of this section, any
person convicted of a violation of subsection (1) of this section shall be
fined in an amount calculated to at least eliminate any and all proceeds or
profits directly or indirectly gained by such person as a result of sales of
controlled substances in violation of the laws of this or other states, or the
United States, up to the amount of five hundred thousand dollars on each count.

(((6))) (5)
Any person, addicted to the use of controlled substances, who voluntarily
applies to the department of social and health services for the purpose of
participating in a rehabilitation program approved by the department for
addicts of controlled substances shall be immune from prosecution for
subsection (1) offenses unless a filing of an information or indictment against
such person for a violation of subsection (1) of this section is made prior to
his or her voluntary participation in the program of the department of social
and health services. All applications for immunity under this section shall be
sent to the department of social and health services in Olympia. It shall be
the duty of the department to stamp each application received pursuant to this
section with the date and time of receipt.

This section shall not
apply to offenses defined and punishable under the provisions of RCW 69.50.401.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
5. A new section is added
to chapter 70.96A RCW to read as follows:

(1) The criminal
justice treatment account is created in the state treasury. Moneys in the
account may be expended solely for substance abuse treatment for offenders
filed upon by a prosecuting attorney in Washington state as well as to fund
drug courts for the provision of drug and alcohol services for nonviolent
offenders. Moneys in the account may be spent only after appropriation.

(2) Revenues to the
criminal justice treatment account consist of: (a) Savings to the state
general fund resulting from reductions in drug offender sentencing as a result
of sections 2 and 3, chapter . . ., Laws of 2001 (sections 2 and 3 of
this act), as calculated pursuant to this section; and (b) any other revenues
appropriated to or deposited in the account.

(3)(a) The department
of corrections, the sentencing guidelines commission, and the caseload forecast
council shall develop a methodology for calculating the projected biennial
savings under this section. Savings shall be projected for the fiscal biennium
beginning on July 1, 2003, and for each biennium thereafter. By December 1,
2001, the proposed methodology shall be submitted to the governor and the
appropriate committees of the legislature. The methodology is deemed approved
unless the legislature enacts legislation during the 2002 session to modify or
reject the methodology.

(b) By December 1,
2002, and December 1st of each even-numbered year thereafter, the department of
corrections shall use the methodology approved in (a) of this subsection to
calculate savings to the state general fund for the ensuing fiscal biennium
resulting from reductions in drug offender sentencing as a result of sections 2
and 3, chapter . . ., Laws of 2001 (sections 2 and 3 this act). The
department shall report the dollar amount of the savings to the office of the
state treasurer and the fiscal committees of the legislature.

(c) For the fiscal
biennium beginning July 1, 2003, and each fiscal biennium thereafter, the
treasurer shall transfer the amount reported for that biennium in (b) of this
subsection into the criminal justice treatment account, divided into eight
equal quarterly payments.

(d) In each
odd-numbered year, the legislature shall appropriate the amount transferred to
the criminal justice treatment account in (c) of this subsection to the
division of alcohol and substance abuse for the purposes of subsection (4) of
this section.

(4) Moneys appropriated
to the division of alcohol and substance abuse from the criminal justice
treatment account shall be distributed as specified in this subsection. The
department shall serve as the fiscal agent for purposes of distribution.

(a) Seventy percent of
amounts appropriated to the division from the account shall be distributed to
counties pursuant to the distribution formula adopted under this section. The
division of alcohol and substance abuse, in consultation with the department of
corrections, the sentencing guidelines commission, the Washington state
association of counties, the Washington state association of drug court
professionals, representatives of the criminal defense bar, and any other
person deemed by the division to be necessary, shall establish a fair and
reasonable methodology for distribution to counties of moneys in the criminal
justice treatment account. County plans submitted for the expenditure of
formula funds must be approved by the panel established in (b) of this
subsection.

(b) Thirty percent of
the amounts appropriated to the division from the account shall be distributed
as grants for purposes of treating offenders against whom charges are filed by
a county prosecuting attorney. The division shall appoint a panel of
representatives from the Washington association of prosecuting attorneys, the
Washington association of sheriffs and police chiefs, the superior court judges
association, the Washington state association of counties, the department of
corrections, and the division. The panel shall award the grants to eligible
counties that have submitted plans pursuant to (a) of this subsection and shall
approve expenditure plans for grant funds. The panel shall attempt to ensure
that treatment as funded by the grants is available to offenders statewide.

(5) The county chemical
dependency specialist, in consultation with the county prosecutor, county
sheriff, and county superior court, shall jointly submit a plan for disposition
of all the funds provided from the criminal justice treatment account within that
county. The funds shall be used solely to provide approved alcohol and
substance abuse treatment pursuant to RCW 70.96A.090.

(6) Counties are
encouraged to consider regional agreements for the efficient delivery of
treatment under this section.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
6. A new section is added
to chapter 43.135 RCW to read as follows:

RCW 43.135.035(4) does
not apply to the transfers established in section 5 of this act.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
7. (1) The sum of
. . . . . . dollars, or as much thereof as may be
necessary, is appropriated for the fiscal year ending June 30, 2002, from the
general fund/public safety and education account to the criminal justice
treatment account for the purposes of this act.

(2) The sum of
. . . . . . dollars, or as much thereof as may be
necessary, is appropriated for the fiscal year ending June 30, 2003, from the
general fund/public safety and education account to the criminal justice
treatment account for the purposes of this act.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
8. A new section is added
to chapter 43.20A RCW to read as follows:

The department of
social and health services shall annually review and monitor the expenditures
made by any county which is funded, in whole or in part, with funds provided by
this act. Counties shall repay any funds that are not spent in accordance with
the requirements of this act.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
9. If any provision of this
act or its application to any person or circumstance is held invalid, the
remainder of the act or the application of the provision to other persons or
circumstances is not affected.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
10. This act applies to
crimes committed on or after July 1, 2001.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 11. This act is necessary for
the immediate preservation of the public peace, health, or safety, or support
of the state government and its existing public institutions, and takes effect
July 1, 2001.

---
END ---