BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF
WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1. RCW 26.09.020 and 1997 c
58 s 945 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) A petition in a
proceeding for dissolution of marriage, legal separation, or for a declaration
concerning the validity of a marriage((,)) shall allege ((the
following)):

(a) The last known state
of residence of each party, and if a party's last known state of
residence is Washington, the last known county of residence;

(b) ((The social
security number of each party;

(c))) The date and place of the marriage;

(((d))) (c)
If the parties are separated the date on which the separation occurred;

(((e))) (d)
The names((,)) and ages((, and addresses)) of any child
dependent upon either or both spouses and whether the wife is pregnant;

(((f))) (e)
Any arrangements as to the residential schedule of, decision making for,
dispute resolution for, and support of the children and the maintenance of a
spouse;

(((g))) (f)
A statement specifying whether there is community or separate property owned by
the parties to be disposed of;

(((h))) (g)
The relief sought.

(2) Either or both
parties to the marriage may initiate the proceeding.

(3) The petitioner
shall complete and file with the petition a certificate under RCW ((70.58.200))
43.70.150 on the form provided by the department of health and the
confidential information form under RCW 26.23.050.

Sec. 2. RCW 26.21.305 and 1993 c
318 s 311 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) A petitioner
seeking to establish or modify a support order or to determine parentage in a
proceeding under this chapter must verify the petition. Unless otherwise
ordered under RCW 26.21.315, the petition or accompanying documents must
provide, so far as known, the name, residential address, and social security
numbers of the obligor and the obligee, and the name, sex, residential address,
social security number, and date of birth of each child for whom support is
sought. The petition must be accompanied by a certified copy of any support
order in effect. The petition may include any other information that may
assist in locating or identifying the respondent.

(2) The petition must
specify the relief sought. The petition and accompanying documents must
conform substantially with the requirements imposed by the forms mandated by
federal law for use in cases filed by a support enforcement agency.

(3) A petitioner
seeking to establish or modify a support order or to determine parentage in a
proceeding under this chapter shall file a properly completed confidential
information form or equivalent as described in RCW 26.23.050 to satisfy the
requirements of subsection (1) of this section. A completed confidential
information form shall be deemed an "accompanying document" under
subsection (1) of this section.

Sec. 3. RCW 26.23.050 and 1998 c
160 s 2 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) If the division of
child support is providing support enforcement services under RCW 26.23.045, or
if a party is applying for support enforcement services by signing the
application form on the bottom of the support order, the superior court shall
include in all court orders that establish or modify a support obligation:

(a) A provision that
orders and directs the responsible parent to make all support payments to the
Washington state support registry;

(b) A statement that
withholding action may be taken against wages, earnings, assets, or benefits,
and liens enforced against real and personal property under the child support
statutes of this or any other state, without further notice to the responsible
parent at any time after entry of the court order, unless:

(i) One of the parties
demonstrates, and the court finds, that there is good cause not to require
immediate income withholding and that withholding should be delayed until a
payment is past due; or

(ii) The parties reach
a written agreement that is approved by the court that provides for an
alternate arrangement;

(c) A statement that
the receiving parent might be required to submit an accounting of how the
support is being spent to benefit the child; and

(d) A statement that
the responsible parent's privileges to obtain and maintain a license, as defined
in RCW 74.20A.320, may not be renewed, or may be suspended if the parent is not
in compliance with a support order as provided in RCW 74.20A.320.

As used in this
subsection and subsection (3) of this section, "good cause not to require
immediate income withholding" means a written determination of why
implementing immediate wage withholding would not be in the child's best
interests and, in modification cases, proof of timely payment of previously
ordered support.

(2) In all other cases
not under subsection (1) of this section, the court may order the responsible
parent to make payments directly to the person entitled to receive the
payments, to the Washington state support registry, or may order that payments
be made in accordance with an alternate arrangement agreed upon by the parties.

(a) The superior court
shall include in all orders under this subsection that establish or modify a
support obligation:

(i) A statement that
withholding action may be taken against wages, earnings, assets, or benefits,
and liens enforced against real and personal property under the child support
statutes of this or any other state, without further notice to the responsible
parent at any time after entry of the court order, unless:

(A) One of the parties
demonstrates, and the court finds, that there is good cause not to require
immediate income withholding and that withholding should be delayed until a
payment is past due; or

(B) The parties reach a
written agreement that is approved by the court that provides for an alternate
arrangement; and

(ii) A statement that
the receiving parent may be required to submit an accounting of how the support
is being spent to benefit the child.

As used in this
subsection, "good cause not to require immediate income withholding"
is any reason that the court finds appropriate.

(b) The superior court
may order immediate or delayed income withholding as follows:

(i) Immediate income
withholding may be ordered if the responsible parent has earnings. If
immediate income withholding is ordered under this subsection, all support
payments shall be paid to the Washington state support registry. The superior
court shall issue a mandatory wage assignment order as set forth in chapter
26.18 RCW when the support order is signed by the court. The parent entitled
to receive the transfer payment is responsible for serving the employer with
the order and for its enforcement as set forth in chapter 26.18 RCW.

(ii) If immediate
income withholding is not ordered, the court shall require that income
withholding be delayed until a payment is past due. The support order shall
contain a statement that withholding action may be taken against wages,
earnings, assets, or benefits, and liens enforced against real and personal
property under the child support statutes of this or any other state, without
further notice to the responsible parent, after a payment is past due.

(c) If a mandatory wage
withholding order under chapter 26.18 RCW is issued under this subsection and
the division of child support provides support enforcement services under RCW
26.23.045, the existing wage withholding assignment is prospectively superseded
upon the division of child support's subsequent service of an income
withholding notice.

(3) The office of
administrative hearings and the department of social and health services shall
require that all support obligations established as administrative orders
include a provision which orders and directs that the responsible parent shall
make all support payments to the Washington state support registry. All
administrative orders shall also state that the responsible parent's privileges
to obtain and maintain a license, as defined in RCW 74.20A.320, may not be
renewed, or may be suspended if the parent is not in compliance with a support
order as provided in RCW 74.20A.320. All administrative orders shall also
state that withholding action may be taken against wages, earnings, assets, or
benefits, and liens enforced against real and personal property under the child
support statutes of this or any other state without further notice to the
responsible parent at any time after entry of the order, unless:

(a) One of the parties
demonstrates, and the presiding officer finds, that there is good cause not to
require immediate income withholding; or

(b) The parties reach a
written agreement that is approved by the presiding officer that provides for
an alternate agreement.

(4) If the support
order does not include the provision ordering and directing that all payments
be made to the Washington state support registry and a statement that
withholding action may be taken against wages, earnings, assets, or benefits if
a support payment is past due or at any time after the entry of the order, or
that a parent's licensing privileges may not be renewed, or may be suspended,
the division of child support may serve a notice on the responsible parent
stating such requirements and authorizations. Service may be by personal
service or any form of mail requiring a return receipt.

(5) Every support order
shall state:

(a) The address where
the support payment is to be sent;

(b) That withholding
action may be taken against wages, earnings, assets, or benefits, and liens
enforced against real and personal property under the child support statutes of
this or any other state, without further notice to the responsible parent at
any time after entry of a support order, unless:

(i) One of the parties
demonstrates, and the court finds, that there is good cause not to require
immediate income withholding; or

(ii) The parties reach
a written agreement that is approved by the court that provides for an
alternate arrangement;

(c) The income of the
parties, if known, or that their income is unknown and the income upon which
the support award is based;

(d) The support award
as a sum certain amount;

(e) The specific day or
date on which the support payment is due;

(f) ((The social
security number, residence address, date of birth, telephone number, driver's
license number, and name and address of the employer of the responsible parent,
except as provided under subsection (6) of this section;

(g) The social
security number and residence address of the physical custodian except as
provided in subsection (6) or (7) of this section;

(h))) The names((, dates of birth, and social
security numbers, if any,)) and ages of the dependent children;

(((i))) (g)
A provision requiring the responsible parent to keep the Washington state
support registry informed of whether he or she has access to health insurance
coverage at reasonable cost and, if so, the health insurance policy
information;

(((j))) (h)
That any parent owing a duty of child support shall be obligated to provide
health insurance coverage for his or her child if coverage that can be extended
to cover the child is or becomes available to that parent through employment or
is union-related as provided under RCW 26.09.105;

(((k))) (i)
That if proof of health insurance coverage or proof that the coverage is
unavailable is not provided within twenty days, the obligee or the department
may seek direct enforcement of the coverage through the obligor's employer or
union without further notice to the obligor as provided under chapter 26.18
RCW;

(((l))) (j)
The reasons for not ordering health insurance coverage if the order fails to
require such coverage;

(((m))) (k)
That the responsible parent's privileges to obtain and maintain a license, as
defined in RCW 74.20A.320, may not be renewed, or may be suspended if the
parent is not in compliance with a support order as provided in RCW 74.20A.320;
((and

(n))) (l) That each parent must:

(i) ((Provide the
state case registry with the information)) Promptly file with the court
and update as necessary the confidential information form required by ((RCW
26.23.055)) subsection (7) of this section; and

(ii) ((Update the
information provided to)) Provide the state case registry ((when))
and update as necessary the information ((changes)) required
by subsection (7) of this section; and

(m) That parties to
administrative support orders shall provide to the state case registry and
update as necessary their residential addresses and the address of the
responsible parent's employer. The division of child support may adopt rules
that govern the collection of parties' current residence and mailing addresses,
telephone numbers, dates of birth, social security numbers, the names of the
children, social security numbers of the children, dates of birth of the
children, driver's license numbers, and the names, addresses, and telephone
numbers of the parties' employers to enforce an administrative support order.
The division of child support shall not release this information if the
division of child support determines that there is reason to believe that
release of the information may result in physical or emotional harm to the
party or to the child, or a restraining order or protective order is in effect
to protect one party from the other party.

(6) ((The address
and employer's name and address of either party may be omitted from a support
order if:

(a) There is reason
to believe that release of the address information may result in physical or
emotional harm to the party or to the child; or

(b) A restraining or
protective order is in effect to protect one party from the other party.

(7) The physical
custodian's address shall be omitted from an order entered under the
administrative procedure act.

(8) When a party's
employment or address is omitted from an order, the order shall state that the
information is known to the division of child support, state case registry.

(9))) After the responsible parent has been ordered
or notified to make payments to the Washington state support registry under
this section, the responsible parent shall be fully responsible for making all
payments to the Washington state support registry and shall be subject to
payroll deduction or other income‑withholding action. The responsible
parent shall not be entitled to credit against a support obligation for any
payments made to a person or agency other than to the Washington state support
registry except as provided under RCW 74.20.101. A civil action may be brought
by the payor to recover payments made to persons or agencies who have received
and retained support moneys paid contrary to the provisions of this section.

(7) All petitioners
and parties to all court actions under Chapters 26.09, 26.10, 26.12, 26.18,
26.21, 26.23, 26.26, and 26.27 RCW shall complete to the best of their
knowledge a verified and signed confidential information form or equivalent
that provides the parties' current residence and mailing addresses, telephone
numbers, dates of birth, social security numbers, driver's license numbers, and
the names, addresses, and telephone numbers of the parties' employers. The
clerk of the court shall not accept petitions, except in parentage actions
initiated by the state, orders of child support, decrees of dissolution, or
paternity orders for filing in such actions unless accompanied by the
confidential information form or equivalent, or unless the confidential
information form or equivalent is already on file with the court clerk. In
lieu of or in addition to requiring the parties to complete a separate confidential
information form, the clerk may collect the information in electronic form.
The clerk of the court shall transmit the confidential information form or its
data to the division of child support with a copy of the order of child support
or paternity order, and may provide copies of the confidential information form
or its data and any related findings, decrees, parenting plans, orders, or
other documents to the state administrative agency that administers Title IV‑A,
IV‑D, or IV‑E of the federal social security act. In state
initiated paternity actions, the parties adjudicated the parents of the child
or children shall complete the confidential information form or equivalent or
the state's attorney of record may complete that form to the best of the
attorney's knowledge.

Sec. 4. RCW 26.23.055 and 1998 c
160 s 3 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) Each party to a
paternity or child support proceeding must provide the court and the Washington
state child support registry with ((his or her:

(a) Social security
number;

(b) Current
residential address;

(c) Date of birth;

(d) Telephone
number;

(e) Driver's license
number; and

(f) Employer's name,
address, and telephone number)) the
confidential information form as required under RCW 26.23.050.

(2) Each party to an
order entered in a child support or paternity proceeding shall update the
information required under subsection (1) of this section promptly after any
change in the information. The duty established under this section continues
as long as any monthly support or support debt remains due under the support
order.

(3) In any proceeding
to establish, enforce, or modify the child support order between the parties, a
party may demonstrate to the presiding officer that he or she has diligently
attempted to locate the other party. Upon a showing of diligent efforts to
locate, the presiding officer shall deem service of process for the action by
delivery of written notice to the address most recently provided by the party
under this section to be adequate notice of the action.

(4) All support orders
shall contain notice to the parties of the obligations established by this
section and possibility of service of process according to subsection (3) of
this section.

Sec. 5. RCW 26.26.130 and 2000 c
119 s 10 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) The judgment and
order of the court determining the existence or nonexistence of the parent and
child relationship shall be determinative for all purposes.

(2) If the judgment and
order of the court is at variance with the child's birth certificate, the court
shall order that an amended birth certificate be issued.

(3) The judgment and
order shall contain other appropriate provisions directed to the appropriate
parties to the proceeding, concerning the duty of current and future support,
the extent of any liability for past support furnished to the child if that
issue is before the court, the furnishing of bond or other security for the
payment of the judgment, or any other matter in the best interest of the
child. The judgment and order may direct the father to pay the reasonable
expenses of the mother's pregnancy and confinement. The judgment and order may
include a continuing restraining order or injunction. In issuing the order,
the court shall consider the provisions of RCW 9.41.800.

(4) The judgment and
order shall contain ((the social security numbers of all parties to the
order)) a provision that each party must file with the court and the
Washington state child support registry and update as necessary the information
required in the confidential information form required by RCW 26.23.050.

(5) Support judgment
and orders shall be for periodic payments which may vary in amount. The court
may limit the father's liability for the past support to the child to the
proportion of the expenses already incurred as the court deems just. The court
shall not limit or affect in any manner the right of nonparties including the
state of Washington to seek reimbursement for support and other services
previously furnished to the child.

(6) After considering
all relevant factors, the court shall order either or both parents to pay an
amount determined pursuant to the schedule and standards contained in chapter
26.19 RCW.

(7) On the same basis
as provided in chapter 26.09 RCW, the court shall make residential provisions
with regard to minor children of the parties, except that a parenting plan
shall not be required unless requested by a party.

(8) In any dispute
between the natural parents of a child and a person or persons who have (a)
commenced adoption proceedings or who have been granted an order of adoption,
and (b) pursuant to a court order, or placement by the department of social and
health services or by a licensed agency, have had actual custody of the child
for a period of one year or more before court action is commenced by the
natural parent or parents, the court shall consider the best welfare and
interests of the child, including the child's need for situation stability, in
determining the matter of custody, and the parent or person who is more fit
shall have the superior right to custody.

(9) In entering an
order under this chapter, the court may issue any necessary continuing
restraining orders, including the restraint provisions of domestic violence
protection orders under chapter 26.50 RCW or antiharassment protection orders
under chapter 10.14 RCW.

(10) Restraining orders
issued under this section restraining or enjoining the person from molesting or
disturbing another party, from going onto the grounds of or entering the home,
workplace, or school of the other party or the day care or school of any child,
or prohibiting the person from knowingly coming within, or knowingly remaining
within, a specified distance of a location, shall prominently bear on the front
page of the order the legend: VIOLATION OF THIS ORDER WITH ACTUAL NOTICE OF
ITS TERMS IS A CRIMINAL OFFENSE UNDER CHAPTER 26.50 RCW AND WILL SUBJECT A
VIOLATOR TO ARREST.

(11) The court shall
order that any restraining order bearing a criminal offense legend, any
domestic violence protection order, or any antiharassment protection order
granted under this section be forwarded by the clerk of the court on or before
the next judicial day to the appropriate law enforcement agency specified in
the order. Upon receipt of the order, the law enforcement agency shall
forthwith enter the order into any computer-based criminal intelligence
information system available in this state used by law enforcement agencies to
list outstanding warrants. The order is fully enforceable in any county in the
state.

(12) If a restraining
order issued pursuant to this section is modified or terminated, the clerk of
the court shall notify the law enforcement agency specified in the order on or
before the next judicial day. Upon receipt of notice that an order has been
terminated, the law enforcement agency shall remove the order from any
computer-based criminal intelligence system.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
6. (1) The legislature's
delegation of authority to an agency under this act is strictly limited to:

(a) The minimum
delegation necessary to administer the act's clear and unambiguous directives;
and

(b) The administration
of circumstances and behaviors foreseeable at the time of enactment.

(2) Agency actions or
rules authorized by this act are subject to the following additional standards
of judicial review, which supercede RCW 34.05.570 (1) and (2) to the extent of
any conflict:

(a) Agencies bear the
burden of demonstrating that the agency action:

(i) Was authorized by
law; and

(ii) Was valid, when
the interest of a party asserting invalidity arises from agency actions
imposing a penalty on the asserting party;

(b) The validity of a
rule may be determined upon petition for declaratory judgment addressed to any
superior court in this state; and

(c) In determining
whether, under RCW 34.05.570(2)(c), a rule exceeds the agency's statutory
authority, the court must also consider whether the rule exceeds the limited
delegation under subsection (1) of this section.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
7. This act takes effect October
1, 2001.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 8. If any provision of this
act or its application to any person or circumstance is held invalid, the
remainder of the act or the application of the provision to other persons or
circumstances is not affected.

---
END ---