BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF
WASHINGTON:

_4 Sec. 1. RCW
90.82.060 and 1998 c 247 s 2 are each amended to read

_5 as follows:

_6 (1) Planning conducted under this chapter must
provide for a

_7 process to allow the local citizens within a WRIA or
multi-WRIA

_8 area to join together in an effort to: (a) Assess the
status of

_9 the water resources of their WRIA or multi-WRIA area;
and (b)

10 determine how best to manage the water resources of the
WRIA or

11 multi-WRIA area to balance the competing resource
demands for that

12 area within the parameters under RCW 90.82.120.

13 (2) Watershed planning under this chapter may be
initiated for

14 a WRIA only with the concurrence of: (a) All counties
within the

15 WRIA; (b) the largest city or town within the WRIA
unless the WRIA

16 does not contain a city or town; and (c) the water
supply utility

17 obtaining the largest quantity of water from the WRIA.
To apply for

18 a grant for organizing the planning unit as provided for
under RCW

p. 1 HB
1865

_1 90.82.040(2)(a), these entities shall designate the
entity that

_2 will serve as the lead agency for the planning effort
and indicate

_3 how the planning unit will be staffed. As used in
this subsection,

_4 a water supply utility does not mean an agency of the
federal

_5 government. In the case of a water supply utility
receiving water

_6 from an agency of the federal government, the water
made available

_7 is water obtained by the water supply utility from the
WRIA within

_8 which the water supply utility provides water to
persons or other

_9 water users.

10 (3) Watershed planning under this chapter may be
initiated for

11 a multi-WRIA area only with the concurrence of: (a) All
counties

12 within the multi-WRIA area; (b) the largest city or town
in each

13 WRIA unless the WRIA does not contain a city or town;
and (c) the

14 water supply utility obtaining the largest quantity of
water in

15 each WRIA.

16 (4) If entities in subsection (2) or (3) of this
section decide

17 jointly and unanimously to proceed, they shall invite
all tribes

18 with reservation lands within the management area.

19 (5) The entities in subsection (2) or (3) of this
section,

20 including the tribes if they affirmatively accept the
invitation,

21 constitute the initiating governments for the purposes
of this

22 section.

23 (6) The organizing grant shall be used to organize
the planning

24 unit and to determine the scope of the planning to be
conducted.

25 In determining the scope of the planning activities,
consideration

26 shall be given to all existing plans and related
planning

27 activities. The scope of planning must include water
quantity

28 elements as provided in RCW 90.82.070, and may include
water

29 quality elements as contained in RCW 90.82.090, habitat
elements

30 as contained in RCW 90.82.100, and instream flow
elements as

31 contained in RCW 90.82.080. The initiating governments
shall work

32 with state government, other local governments within
the

33 management area, and affected tribal governments, in
developing a

34 planning process. The initiating governments may hold
public

35 meetings as deemed necessary to develop a proposed scope
of work

36 and a proposed composition of the planning unit. In
developing a

37 proposed composition of the planning unit, the
initiating

HB 1865 p. 2

_1 governments shall provide for representation of a wide
range of

_2 water resource interests.

_3 (7) Each state agency with regulatory or other
interests in the

_4 WRIA or multi-WRIA area to be planned shall assist the
local

_5 citizens in the planning effort to the greatest extent

_6 practicable, recognizing any fiscal limitations. In
providing such

_7 technical assistance and to facilitate representation on
the

_8 planning unit, state agencies may organize and agree
upon their

_9 representation on the planning unit. Such technical
assistance must

10 only be at the request of and to the extent desired by
the

11 planning unit conducting such planning. The number of
state agency

12 representatives on the planning unit shall be determined
by the

13 initiating governments in consultation with the
governor's office.

14 (8) As used in this section, "lead agency"
means the entity

15 that coordinates staff support of its own or of other
local

16 governments and receives grants for developing a
watershed plan.

‑‑‑ END ‑‑‑

p. 3 HB
1865