BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF
WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1. RCW 66.44.318 and 1995
c 100 s 2 are each amended to read as follows:

Licensees
holding nonretail class liquor licenses are permitted to allow their employees
between (([the])) the ages of eighteen and twenty-one to stock,
merchandise, and handle beer or wine on or about the nonretail premises if
there is an adult twenty-one years of age or older on duty supervising such
activities on the premises, and licensees holding grocery store or beer
and/or wine specialty shop licenses exclusively are permitted to allow
employees of the nonretail class liquor licensee between the ages of eighteen
and twenty-one to stock merchandise or handle beer or wine on or about the
retail licensee's premises as long as there is an adult twenty-one years of age
or older, employed by the retail licensee, on duty supervising the activities
on the licensee's premises, however, nothing shall be construed to permit a
nonretail licensee's employee, between the ages of eighteen and twenty-one, to
handle, transport, or otherwise possess beer or wine beyond the premises of the
retail licensee.

--- END ---