BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF
WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec.
1. (1) The legislature finds
that educational staff associates provide many services that are vital to the
educational attainment and physical and mental well-being of Washington's
public school students. The legislature also finds that these well-trained and
accomplished professionals are an essential and valued part of the state's
teaching corps. The legislature further finds that these professionals have
rigorous certification processes, but that the national associations that
provide that certification do not all have advanced certification for
experienced members within the various professions. Therefore, the legislature
intends to ask the professional educator standards board to recommend a means
to recognize the accomplishments of experienced educational staff associates
through an advanced certification process that is comparable to the
certification process of the national board for professional teaching
standards.

(2) The
professional educator standards board shall review national certification standards
for educational staff associates and recommend a way that Washington may
recognize the accomplishments of educational staff associates who successfully
complete rigorous, advanced certification that is comparable to the
certification of the national board for professional teaching standards. By
June 30, 2002, the board shall report its findings and recommendations to the
governor, the legislative education and fiscal committees, the state board of
education, the superintendent of public instruction, and other interested
parties.

---
END ---