BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF
WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec.
1. This act may be known and
cited as the Washington State Residents Tax Relief Act.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
2. A new section is added
to chapter 82.08 RCW to read as follows:

(1) Subject to the
conditions and limitations provided under this section, the tax levied by RCW
82.08.020 does not apply to the sale of a clothing item with a selling price of
one hundred fifty dollars or less or to the sale of a school supply item with a
selling price of fifty dollars or less during the period every year from 12:01
a.m., August 18th and ending 12:00 a.m., August 26th.

(2) A layaway is
eligible for exemption under this section if at least ten percent of the
selling price is placed as a deposit with the seller during the exemption
period and the item is otherwise eligible for exemption under this section.

(3) A raincheck
purchase is not eligible for exemption under this section unless the purchase
is completed during the exemption period.

(4) The definitions in
this subsection apply for the purposes of this section.

(a)(i) "Clothing
item" means human wearing apparel suitable for general use, including a
component to be directly incorporated into the apparel.

(ii) "Clothing
item" includes, but is not limited to, the following: Household aprons;
baby receiving blankets; bathing suits or caps; belts or suspenders; boots;
coats or jackets; costumes; children's or adult diapers; footlets; formal wear;
gloves or mittens; hats or caps; hosiery; insoles for shoes; neckties;
overshoes; pantyhose; scarves; sewing materials that may be used in the
construction, assembly, or repair of clothing, such as buttons, fabric, lace,
thread, yarn, or zippers; shoes; shoelaces; shower caps or clogs; slippers;
sneakers; steel-toed shoes; nonathletic uniforms; and wedding apparel.

(iii) "Clothing
item" does not include the following: Belt buckles offered for sale
separately; costume masks offered for sale separately; patches offered for sale
separately; emblems offered for sale separately; and sewing equipment,
including knitting needles, patterns, pins, scissors, sewing machines, sewing
needles, tape measures, or thimbles.

(b)(i) "School
supply item" means an item required by a teacher, school, or school district
preparatory to the beginning of an academic year; or an item generally accepted
as being necessary for a student to be adequately prepared for the undertaking
of an academic year.

(ii) "School
supply item" includes, but is not limited to, the following: Colored
markers; colored pencils; crayons; dividers; drawing compasses; erasers; glue;
highlighters; notebooks; notepads; paints; paper; nonelectronic pencil
sharpeners; pencils; pens; portfolios; adhesive notes; protractors; refillable
pencil lead; report covers; rulers; school backpacks; scissors; scotch tape;
nonelectronic staplers; staples; white out; or writing tablets.

(c) "Layaway"
means a purchase in which the buyer pays a deposit to the seller and then makes
subsequent payments or deposits to the seller over time, until an amount equal
to the total purchase price is collected. The seller agrees in turn to hold
the merchandise until total payment is received.

(d)
"Raincheck" means a guarantee, offered at the option of the seller,
to honor at a later date the selling price of merchandise at the time the buyer
initially demanded the merchandise.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
3. A new section is added
to chapter 82.12 RCW to read as follows:

The provisions of this
chapter do not apply to the sale of a clothing item if the clothing item has a
value of one hundred fifty dollars or less or to the sale of a school supply
item if the school supply item has a value of fifty dollars or less and is
purchased during the period from 12:01 a.m., August 18th and ending 12:00 a.m.,
August 26th of any year. The definitions, conditions, and limitations of
section 2 of this act apply to this section.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 4. This act is necessary for
the immediate preservation of the public peace, health, or safety, or support
of the state government and its existing public institutions, and takes effect
immediately.

---
END ---