BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF
WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec.
1. A new section is added
to chapter 36.70A RCW to read as follows:

The legislature finds
that this chapter is intended to recognize the importance of rural lands and
rural character to Washington's economy, its people, and its environment, while
respecting regional differences. Rural lands and rural-based economies enhance
the economic desirability of the state, help to preserve traditional economic
activities, and contribute to the state's overall quality of life.

The legislature finds
that to retain and enhance the job base in rural areas, rural counties must
have flexibility to create opportunities for business development. Further,
the legislature finds that rural counties must have the flexibility to retain
existing businesses and allow them to expand. The legislature recognizes that
not all business developments in rural counties require an urban level of
services; and that many businesses in rural areas fit within the definition of
rural character identified by the local planning unit.

Finally, the
legislature finds that in defining its rural element under RCW 36.70A.070(5), a
county should foster land use patterns and develop a local vision of rural
character that will: Help preserve rural-based economies and rural prosperity;
foster opportunities for small-scale, rural-based employment and
self-employment; permit the operation of rural-based businesses that are
consistent with existing and planned land use patterns; foster the private
stewardship of the land; and enhance the rural sense of community and quality
of life.

Sec. 2. RCW 36.70A.030 and 1997
c 429 s 3 are each amended to read as follows:

Unless the context
clearly requires otherwise, the definitions in this section apply throughout
this chapter.

(1) "Adopt a
comprehensive land use plan" means to enact a new comprehensive land use
plan or to update an existing comprehensive land use plan.

(2) "Agricultural
land" means land primarily devoted to the commercial production of
horticultural, viticultural, floricultural, dairy, apiary, vegetable, or animal
products or of berries, grain, hay, straw, turf, seed, Christmas trees not
subject to the excise tax imposed by RCW 84.33.100 through 84.33.140, finfish
in upland hatcheries, or livestock, and that has long-term commercial
significance for agricultural production.

(3) "City"
means any city or town, including a code city.

(4) "Comprehensive
land use plan," "comprehensive plan," or "plan" means
a generalized coordinated land use policy statement of the governing body of a
county or city that is adopted pursuant to this chapter.

(5) "Critical
areas" include the following areas and ecosystems: (a) Wetlands; (b)
areas with a critical recharging effect on aquifers used for potable water; (c)
fish and wildlife habitat conservation areas; (d) frequently flooded areas; and
(e) geologically hazardous areas.

(6)
"Department" means the department of community, trade, and economic
development.

(7) "Development
regulations" or "regulation" means the controls placed on
development or land use activities by a county or city, including, but not
limited to, zoning ordinances, critical areas ordinances, shoreline master
programs, official controls, planned unit development ordinances, subdivision
ordinances, and binding site plan ordinances together with any amendments
thereto. A development regulation does not include a decision to approve a
project permit application, as defined in RCW 36.70B.020, even though the
decision may be expressed in a resolution or ordinance of the legislative body
of the county or city.

(8) "Forest
land" means land primarily devoted to growing trees for long-term
commercial timber production on land that can be economically and practically
managed for such production, including Christmas trees subject to the excise
tax imposed under RCW 84.33.100 through 84.33.140, and that has long-term
commercial significance. In determining whether forest land is primarily
devoted to growing trees for long-term commercial timber production on land
that can be economically and practically managed for such production, the
following factors shall be considered: (a) The proximity of the land to urban,
suburban, and rural settlements; (b) surrounding parcel size and the compatibility
and intensity of adjacent and nearby land uses; (c) long-term local economic
conditions that affect the ability to manage for timber production; and (d) the
availability of public facilities and services conducive to conversion of
forest land to other uses.

(9) "Geologically
hazardous areas" means areas that because of their susceptibility to
erosion, sliding, earthquake, or other geological events, are not suited to the
siting of commercial, residential, or industrial development consistent with
public health or safety concerns.

(10) "Long-term
commercial significance" includes the growing capacity, productivity, and
soil composition of the land for long-term commercial production, in
consideration with the land's proximity to population areas, and the
possibility of more intense uses of the land.

(11)
"Minerals" include gravel, sand, and valuable metallic substances.

(12) "Public
facilities" include streets, roads, highways, sidewalks, street and road
lighting systems, traffic signals, domestic water systems, storm and sanitary
sewer systems, parks and recreational facilities, and schools.

(13) "Public
services" include fire protection and suppression, law enforcement, public
health, education, recreation, environmental protection, and other governmental
services.

(14) "Rural
character" refers to the patterns of land use and development established
by a county in the rural element of its comprehensive plan:

(a) In which open
space, the natural landscape, and vegetation predominate over the built
environment;

(b) That foster
traditional rural lifestyles, rural-based economies, and opportunities to both
live and work in rural areas;

(c) That provide visual
landscapes that are traditionally found in rural areas and communities;

(d) That are compatible
with the use of the land by wildlife and for fish and wildlife habitat;

(e) That reduce the
inappropriate conversion of undeveloped land into sprawling, low‑density
development;

(f) That generally do
not require the extension of urban governmental services; and

(g) That are consistent
with the protection of natural surface water flows and ground water and surface
water recharge and discharge areas.

(15) "Rural
county" means a county with a population density fewer than one hundred
persons per square mile as determined by the office of financial management and
published each year by the department for the period from July 1st to June
30th.

(16) "Rural
development" refers to development outside the urban growth area and
outside agricultural, forest, and mineral resource lands designated pursuant to
RCW 36.70A.170. Rural development can consist of a variety of uses and
residential densities, including clustered residential development, at levels
that are consistent with the preservation of rural character and the
requirements of the rural element. Rural development does not refer to
agriculture or forestry activities that may be conducted in rural areas.

(((16))) (17)
"Rural governmental services" or "rural services" include
those public services and public facilities historically and typically
delivered at an intensity usually found in rural areas, and may include
domestic water systems, fire and police protection services, transportation and
public transit services, and other public utilities associated with rural
development and normally not associated with urban areas. Rural services do
not include storm or sanitary sewers, except as otherwise authorized by RCW
36.70A.110(4).

(((17))) (18)
"Small-scale business" means any business entity, including a sole
proprietorship, corporation, partnership, or other legal entity, that meets a
definition of a "small-scale business" as set forth in an ordinance
adopted by the legislative authority of a rural county.

(19) "Urban
growth" refers to growth that makes intensive use of land for the location
of buildings, structures, and impermeable surfaces to such a degree as to be
incompatible with the primary use of land for the production of food, other
agricultural products, or fiber, or the extraction of mineral resources, rural
uses, rural development, and natural resource lands designated pursuant to RCW
36.70A.170. A pattern of more intensive rural development, as provided in RCW
36.70A.070(5)(d), is not urban growth. When allowed to spread over wide areas,
urban growth typically requires urban governmental services.
"Characterized by urban growth" refers to land having urban growth
located on it, or to land located in relationship to an area with urban growth
on it as to be appropriate for urban growth.

(((18))) (20)
"Urban growth areas" means those areas designated by a county
pursuant to RCW 36.70A.110.

(((19))) (21)
"Urban governmental services" or "urban services" include
those public services and public facilities at an intensity historically and
typically provided in cities, specifically including storm and sanitary sewer
systems, domestic water systems, street cleaning services, fire and police
protection services, public transit services, and other public utilities
associated with urban areas and normally not associated with rural areas.

(((20))) (22)
"Wetland" or "wetlands" means areas that are inundated or
saturated by surface water or ground water at a frequency and duration
sufficient to support, and that under normal circumstances do support, a
prevalence of vegetation typically adapted for life in saturated soil
conditions. Wetlands generally include swamps, marshes, bogs, and similar
areas. Wetlands do not include those artificial wetlands intentionally created
from nonwetland sites, including, but not limited to, irrigation and drainage
ditches, grass-lined swales, canals, detention facilities, wastewater treatment
facilities, farm ponds, and landscape amenities, or those wetlands created
after July 1, 1990, that were unintentionally created as a result of the
construction of a road, street, or highway. Wetlands may include those
artificial wetlands intentionally created from nonwetland areas created to
mitigate conversion of wetlands.

Sec. 3. RCW 36.70A.070 and 1998
c 171 s 2 are each amended to read as follows:

The comprehensive plan
of a county or city that is required or chooses to plan under RCW 36.70A.040
shall consist of a map or maps, and descriptive text covering objectives,
principles, and standards used to develop the comprehensive plan. The plan
shall be an internally consistent document and all elements shall be consistent
with the future land use map. A comprehensive plan shall be adopted and
amended with public participation as provided in RCW 36.70A.140.

Each comprehensive plan
shall include a plan, scheme, or design for each of the following:

(1) A land use element
designating the proposed general distribution and general location and extent
of the uses of land, where appropriate, for agriculture, timber production,
housing, commerce, industry, recreation, open spaces, general aviation
airports, public utilities, public facilities, and other land uses. The land
use element shall include population densities, building intensities, and
estimates of future population growth. The land use element shall provide for
protection of the quality and quantity of ground water used for public water
supplies. Where applicable, the land use element shall review drainage,
flooding, and storm water run-off in the area and nearby jurisdictions and
provide guidance for corrective actions to mitigate or cleanse those discharges
that pollute waters of the state, including Puget Sound or waters entering
Puget Sound.

(2) A housing element
ensuring the vitality and character of established residential neighborhoods
that: (a) Includes an inventory and analysis of existing and projected housing
needs; (b) includes a statement of goals, policies, objectives, and mandatory
provisions for the preservation, improvement, and development of housing,
including single-family residences; (c) identifies sufficient land for housing,
including, but not limited to, government-assisted housing, housing for
low-income families, manufactured housing, multifamily housing, and group homes
and foster care facilities; and (d) makes adequate provisions for existing and
projected needs of all economic segments of the community.

(3) A capital
facilities plan element consisting of: (a) An inventory of existing capital facilities
owned by public entities, showing the locations and capacities of the capital
facilities; (b) a forecast of the future needs for such capital facilities; (c)
the proposed locations and capacities of expanded or new capital facilities;
(d) at least a six-year plan that will finance such capital facilities within
projected funding capacities and clearly identifies sources of public money for
such purposes; and (e) a requirement to reassess the land use element if
probable funding falls short of meeting existing needs and to ensure that the
land use element, capital facilities plan element, and financing plan within
the capital facilities plan element are coordinated and consistent.

(4) A utilities element
consisting of the general location, proposed location, and capacity of all
existing and proposed utilities, including, but not limited to, electrical
lines, telecommunication lines, and natural gas lines.

(5) Rural element.
Counties shall include a rural element including lands that are not designated
for urban growth, agriculture, forest, or mineral resources. The following
provisions shall apply to the rural element:

(a) Growth management
act goals and local circumstances. Because circumstances vary from county to
county, in establishing patterns of rural densities and uses, a county may
consider local circumstances, but shall develop a written record explaining how
the rural element harmonizes the planning goals in RCW 36.70A.020 and meets the
requirements of this chapter.

(b) Rural development.
The rural element shall permit rural development, forestry, and agriculture in
rural areas. The rural element shall provide for a variety of rural densities,
uses, essential public facilities, and rural governmental services needed to
serve the permitted densities and uses. In order to achieve a variety of rural
densities and uses, counties may provide for clustering, density transfer,
design guidelines, conservation easements, and other innovative techniques that
will accommodate appropriate rural densities and uses that are not
characterized by urban growth and that are consistent with rural character.

(c) Measures governing
rural development. The rural element shall include measures that apply to
rural development and protect the rural character of the area, as established
by the county, by:

(i) Containing or
otherwise controlling rural development;

(ii) Assuring visual
compatibility of rural development with the surrounding rural area;

(iii) Reducing the
inappropriate conversion of undeveloped land into sprawling, low-density
development in the rural area;

(iv) Protecting
critical areas, as provided in RCW 36.70A.060, and surface water and ground
water resources; and

(v) Protecting against
conflicts with the use of agricultural, forest, and mineral resource lands
designated under RCW 36.70A.170.

(d) Limited areas of
more intensive rural development. Subject to the requirements of this
subsection and except as otherwise specifically provided in this subsection
(5)(d), the rural element may allow for limited areas of more intensive rural
development, including necessary public facilities and public services to serve
the limited area as follows:

(i) Rural development
consisting of the infill, development, or redevelopment of existing commercial,
industrial, residential, or mixed-use areas, whether characterized as shoreline
development, villages, hamlets, rural activity centers, or crossroads
developments. A commercial, industrial, residential, shoreline, or mixed-use
area shall be subject to the requirements of (d)(iv) of this subsection, but
shall not be subject to the requirements of (c)(ii) and (iii) of this
subsection. An industrial area is not required to be principally designed to
serve the existing and projected rural population;

(ii) The
intensification of development on lots containing, or new development of,
small-scale recreational or tourist uses, including commercial facilities to
serve those recreational or tourist uses, that rely on a rural location and
setting, but that do not include new residential development. A small-scale
recreation or tourist use is not required to be principally designed to serve
the existing and projected rural population. Public services and public
facilities shall be limited to those necessary to serve the recreation or
tourist use and shall be provided in a manner that does not permit low-density
sprawl;

(iii) The
intensification of development on lots containing isolated nonresidential uses
or new development of isolated cottage industries and isolated small-scale
businesses that are not principally designed to serve the existing and
projected rural population and nonresidential uses, but do provide job
opportunities for rural residents. Rural counties may allow the expansion
of small-scale businesses and may allow new businesses to utilize sites
previously occupied by an existing business. Public services and public
facilities shall be limited to those necessary to serve the isolated
nonresidential use and shall be provided in a manner that does not permit
low-density sprawl;

(iv) A county shall
adopt measures to minimize and contain the existing areas or uses of more
intensive rural development, as appropriate, authorized under this subsection.
Lands included in such existing areas or uses shall not extend beyond the
logical outer boundary of the existing area or use, thereby allowing a new
pattern of low-density sprawl. Existing areas are those that are clearly
identifiable and contained and where there is a logical boundary delineated
predominately by the built environment, but that may also include undeveloped
lands if limited as provided in this subsection. The county shall establish
the logical outer boundary of an area of more intensive rural development. In
establishing the logical outer boundary the county shall address (A) the need
to preserve the character of existing natural neighborhoods and communities,
(B) physical boundaries such as bodies of water, streets and highways, and land
forms and contours, (C) the prevention of abnormally irregular boundaries, and
(D) the ability to provide public facilities and public services in a manner that
does not permit low-density sprawl;

(v) For purposes of (d)
of this subsection, an existing area or existing use is one that was in
existence:

(A) On July 1, 1990, in
a county that was initially required to plan under all of the provisions of
this chapter;

(B) On the date the
county adopted a resolution under RCW 36.70A.040(2), in a county that is
planning under all of the provisions of this chapter under RCW 36.70A.040(2);
or

(C) On the date the
office of financial management certifies the county's population as provided in
RCW 36.70A.040(5), in a county that is planning under all of the provisions of
this chapter pursuant to RCW 36.70A.040(5).

(e) Exception. This
subsection shall not be interpreted to permit in the rural area a major
industrial development or a master planned resort unless otherwise specifically
permitted under RCW 36.70A.360 and 36.70A.365.

(6) A transportation
element that implements, and is consistent with, the land use element.

(a) The transportation
element shall include the following subelements:

(i) Land use
assumptions used in estimating travel;

(ii) Estimated traffic
impacts to state-owned transportation facilities resulting from land use
assumptions to assist the department of transportation in monitoring the
performance of state facilities, to plan improvements for the facilities, and
to assess the impact of land-use decisions on state-owned transportation
facilities;

(iii) Facilities and
services needs, including:

(A) An inventory of
air, water, and ground transportation facilities and services, including
transit alignments and general aviation airport facilities, to define existing
capital facilities and travel levels as a basis for future planning. This
inventory must include state-owned transportation facilities within the city or
county's jurisdiction boundaries;

(B) Level of service
standards for all locally owned arterials and transit routes to serve as a
gauge to judge performance of the system. These standards should be regionally
coordinated;

(C) For state-owned
transportation facilities, level of service standards for highways, as
prescribed in chapters 47.06 and 47.80 RCW, to gauge the performance of the
system. The purposes of reflecting level of service standards for state
highways in the local comprehensive plan are to monitor the performance of the
system, to evaluate improvement strategies, and to facilitate coordination
between the county's or city's six-year street, road, or transit program and
the department of transportation's six-year investment program. The
concurrency requirements of (b) of this subsection do not apply to
transportation facilities and services of statewide significance except for
counties consisting of islands whose only connection to the mainland are state
highways or ferry routes. In these island counties, state highways and ferry
route capacity must be a factor in meeting the concurrency requirements in (b)
of this subsection;

(D) Specific actions
and requirements for bringing into compliance locally owned transportation facilities
or services that are below an established level of service standard;

(E) Forecasts of
traffic for at least ten years based on the adopted land use plan to provide
information on the location, timing, and capacity needs of future growth;

(F) Identification of
state and local system needs to meet current and future demands. Identified
needs on state-owned transportation facilities must be consistent with the
statewide multimodal transportation plan required under chapter 47.06 RCW;

(iv) Finance,
including:

(A) An analysis of
funding capability to judge needs against probable funding resources;

(B) A multiyear
financing plan based on the needs identified in the comprehensive plan, the
appropriate parts of which shall serve as the basis for the six-year street,
road, or transit program required by RCW 35.77.010 for cities, RCW 36.81.121
for counties, and RCW 35.58.2795 for public transportation systems. The
multiyear financing plan should be coordinated with the six-year improvement
program developed by the department of transportation as required by RCW
47.05.030;

(C) If probable funding
falls short of meeting identified needs, a discussion of how additional funding
will be raised, or how land use assumptions will be reassessed to ensure that
level of service standards will be met;

(v) Intergovernmental
coordination efforts, including an assessment of the impacts of the
transportation plan and land use assumptions on the transportation systems of
adjacent jurisdictions;

(vi) Demand-management
strategies.

(b) After adoption of
the comprehensive plan by jurisdictions required to plan or who choose to plan
under RCW 36.70A.040, local jurisdictions must adopt and enforce ordinances
which prohibit development approval if the development causes the level of
service on a locally owned transportation facility to decline below the
standards adopted in the transportation element of the comprehensive plan,
unless transportation improvements or strategies to accommodate the impacts of
development are made concurrent with the development. These strategies may
include increased public transportation service, ride sharing programs, demand
management, and other transportation systems management strategies. For the
purposes of this subsection (6) "concurrent with the development"
shall mean that improvements or strategies are in place at the time of
development, or that a financial commitment is in place to complete the
improvements or strategies within six years.

(c) The
transportation element described in this subsection (6), and the six-year plans
required by RCW 35.77.010 for cities, RCW 36.81.121 for counties, RCW
35.58.2795 for public transportation systems, and RCW 47.05.030 for the state,
must be consistent.

---
END ---