BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF
WASHINGTON:

_4 Sec. 1. RCW
90.66.060 and 1979 c 3 s 6 are each amended to read as

_5 follows:

_6 (1) The right to withdraw water for use for the
irrigation of

_7 agricultural lands under authority of a family farm
permit shall

_8 have no time limit but shall be conditioned upon the
land being

_9 irrigated complying with the definition of a family farm
as

10 defined at the time the permit is issued: PROVIDED,
HOWEVER, That

11 if the acquisition by any person of land and water
rights by gift,

12 devise, bequest, or by way of bona fide satisfaction of
a debt,

13 would otherwise cause land being irrigated pursuant to a
family

14 farm permit to lose its status as a family farm, such
acquisition

15 shall be deemed to have no effect upon the status of
family farm

16 water permits pertaining to land held or acquired by the
person

17 acquiring such land and water rights if all lands held
or acquired

p. 1 HB
1870

_1 are again in compliance with the definition of a family
farm

_2 within five years from the date of such acquisition.

_3 (2) If the department determines that water is being
withdrawn

_4 under a family farm permit for use on land not in
conformity with

_5 the definition of a family farm, the department shall
notify the

_6 holder of such family farm permit by personal service of
such fact

_7 and the permit shall be suspended two years from the
date of

_8 receipt of notice unless the person having a controlling
interest

_9 in said land satisfies the department that such land is
again in

10 conformity with the definition of a family farm. The
department

11 may, upon a showing of good cause and reasonable effort
to attain

12 compliance on the part of the person having the
controlling

13 interest in such land, extend the two year period prior
to

14 suspension. If conformity is not achieved prior to five
years from

15 the date of notice the rights of withdrawal shall be
canceled.

16 (3)(a) If the purpose of use of a water right
established under

17 the authority of a family farm permit is changed to
an

18 agricultural use other than an agricultural
irrigation use, the

19 restrictions provided by subsections (1) and (2) of
this section

20 do not apply to the other agricultural use.

21 (b) If the place of use for a water right
established under the

22 authority of a family farm permit is located within
an urban

23 growth area designated under RCW 36.70A.110 or is
located within a

24 city or town in a county that is not planning under
chapter 36.70A

25 RCW, the water right may be transferred, changed, or
amended to

26 the same extent as any other water right subject to
the following

27 additional requirements:

28 (i) If the transfer, change, or amendment is to a
use of water

29 for municipal water supply purposes, the distribution
works of the

30 recipient of the transferred, changed, or amended
water right

31 shall meet the water conservation standards
established by the

32 department of health for such works by rule or
guideline in effect

33 at the time the application for the transfer, change,
or amendment

34 is filed; and

35 (ii) If following such a transfer, change, or
amendment, any

36 portion of the use of water under the right is for
agricultural

HB 1870 p. 2

_1 irrigation purposes, that portion of the use is
subject to the

_2 restrictions provided by subsections (1) and (2) of
this section.

‑‑‑ END ‑‑‑

p. 3 HB
1870