BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF
WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec.
1. A new section is added
to chapter 82.16 RCW to read as follows:

This chapter does not
apply to amounts received for water services supplied by an entity that holds a
permit under RCW 90.46.030 when the water supplied is reclaimed water as
defined in RCW 90.46.010.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
2. A new section is added
to chapter 82.08 RCW to read as follows:

The tax levied by RCW
82.08.020 shall not apply to sales of machinery and equipment used directly in
transmitting, distributing, or storing reclaimed water as defined in RCW
90.46.010, or to sales of or charges made for labor and services rendered in
respect to installing such machinery and equipment. As used in this section,
"machinery and equipment" means pipelines, outfalls, conduits,
pumping stations, instrumentation and monitoring equipment, structures,
machinery, equipment, accessories, and all other construction, devices,
appurtenances, and facilities used for the primary purpose of conducting
reclaimed water from a wastewater treatment facility for a beneficial use,
including the augmentation of streamflow for fish.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
3. A new section is added
to chapter 82.12 RCW to read as follows:

The
provisions of this chapter shall not apply with respect to the use of machinery
and equipment used directly in transmitting, distributing, or storing reclaimed
water as defined in RCW 90.46.010. "Machinery and equipment" means
pipelines, outfalls, conduits, pumping stations, instrumentation and monitoring
equipment, structures, machinery, equipment, accessories, and all other
construction, devices, appurtenances, and facilities used for the primary
purpose of conducting reclaimed water from a wastewater treatment facility for
a beneficial use, including augmentation of streamflow for fish.

---
END ---