BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF
WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec.
1. A new section is added
to chapter 82.16 RCW to read as follows:

In
computing tax under this chapter, there shall be deducted from the gross income
those amounts expended to improve consumers' efficiency of water use or to
otherwise reduce the use of water by the consumer.

--- END ---