BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF
WASHINGTON:

_4 Sec. 1. RCW
90.03.360 and 1994 c 264 s 85 are each amended to read

_5 as follows:

_6 (1) The owner or owners of any water diversion shall
maintain,

_7 to the satisfaction of the department of ecology,
substantial

_8 controlling works and a measuring device constructed and

_9 maintained to permit accurate measurement and practical
regulation

10 of the flow of water diverted. Every owner or manager
of a

11 reservoir for the storage of water shall construct and
maintain,

12 when required by the department, any measuring device
necessary to

13 ascertain the natural flow into and out of said
reservoir.

14 Metering of diversions or measurement by other
approved methods

15 shall be required as a condition for all new surface
water right

16 permits, and except as provided in subsection (2) of
this section,

17 may be required as a condition for all previously
existing surface

p. 1 HB
1873

_1 water rights. The department may also require, as a
condition for

_2 all water rights, metering of diversions, and reports
regarding

_3 such metered diversions as to the amount of water being
diverted.

_4 Such reports shall be in a form prescribed by the department.

_5 (2) Where water diversions are from waters in which
the

_6 salmonid stock status is depressed or critical, as
determined by

_7 the department of fish and wildlife, or where the volume
of water

_8 being diverted exceeds one cubic foot per second, the
department

_9 shall require metering or measurement by other approved
methods as

10 a condition for all new and previously existing water
rights or

11 claims. The department shall attempt to integrate the
requirements

12 of this subsection into its existing compliance workload

13 priorities, but shall prioritize the requirements of
this

14 subsection ahead of the existing compliance workload
where a delay

15 may cause the decline of wild salmonids. The department
shall

16 notify the department of fish and wildlife of the status
of fish

17 screens associated with these diversions.

18 This subsection (2) shall not apply to diversions
for public or

19 private hatcheries or fish rearing facilities if the
diverted

20 water is returned directly to the waters from which it
was

21 diverted.

22 This chapter shall not be construed as requiring
the department

23 to exercise the authorities granted by RCW
90.44.450. The

24 authorities granted by RCW 90.44.450 are exclusively
discretionary

25 powers.

26 Sec. 2. RCW
90.44.030 and 1945 c 263 s 2 are each amended to read

27 as follows:

28 The rights to appropriate the surface waters of the
state and

29 the rights acquired by the appropriation and use of surface
waters

30 shall not be affected or impaired by any of the
provisions of this

31 supplementary chapter and, to the extent that any
underground

32 water is part of or tributary to the source of any
surface stream

33 or lake, or that the withdrawal of ground water may
affect the

34 flow of any spring, water course, lake, or other body of
surface

35 water, the right of an appropriator and owner of surface
water

36 shall be superior to any subsequent right hereby
authorized to be

37 acquired in or to ground water.

HB 1873 p. 2

_1 This chapter shall not be construed as requiring
the department

_2 to exercise the authorities granted by RCW
90.44.450. The

_3 authorities granted by RCW 90.44.450 are exclusively
discretionary

_4 powers.

_5 Sec. 3. RCW
90.44.450 and 1989 c 348 s 7 are each amended to read

_6 as follows:

_7 The department of ecology may require withdrawals of
ground

_8 water to be metered, or measured by other approved methods,
as a

_9 condition for a new water right permit. The department
may also

10 require, as a condition for such permits, reports
regarding such

11 withdrawals as to the amount of water being withdrawn.
These

12 reports shall be in a form prescribed by the department.

13 This chapter shall not be construed as requiring
the department

14 to exercise the authorities granted by this section.
The

15 authorities granted by this section are exclusively
discretionary

16 powers.

‑‑‑ END ‑‑‑

p. 3 HB
1873