BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF
WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec.
1. A new section is added
to chapter 43.20 RCW to read as follows:

The department of
health shall adopt as rules conservation and efficiency standards and
safeguards that shall apply to the transmission of water to and the
distribution of water by a public water system receiving water through an
intertie approved after the effective date of this section. The standards
shall apply to a public water system receiving such water if the public water
system has at least one thousand service connections.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
2. A new section is added
to chapter 90.03 RCW to read as follows:

If a water right
certificate was issued by the department of ecology before the effective date
of this section to a public water system and, at the time the certificate was
issued, the amount of water listed on the certificate as being subject to
diversion for use under the certificate included both amounts beneficially used
by the date of the issuance and amounts not yet beneficially used by that date,
the water right represented by the certificate is for the total of both such
amounts. Any amounts not yet beneficially used under such a certificate by the
effective date of this section are governed by the inchoate portion of the
water right and are available to a public water system holding the certificated
right for further development as prescribed in section 3 of this act and for
transfer or change for further development as prescribed in section 3 of this
act. The place of use for the water right represented by such a certificate is
the place of use listed on the certificate or the place of use identified in
the water system plan approved by the department of health on the effective
date of this section for the public water system, whichever document identifies
a larger service area for the public water system.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
3. A new section is added
to chapter 90.03 RCW to read as follows:

The beneficial use of
water governed by an inchoate portion of a water right described in section 2
or 5 of this act that begins on or after the effective date of this section is
subject to the following conditions:

(1) The beneficial use
shall be consistent with any comprehensive land use plan adopted under chapter
36.70A RCW for the area in which the beneficial use takes place or, if
comprehensive land use planning has not been conducted for that area under
chapter 36.70A RCW, the beneficial use shall be consistent with any
comprehensive plan adopted under chapter 36.70 RCW for the area;

(2) The beneficial use
shall be initiated not later than fifty years after the effective date of this
section; and

(3) If a public water
system applies for a transfer, change, or amendment to an inchoate portion of
its water right to provide for the initial beneficial use of water governed by
the inchoate portion of the right, the public water system and the department
shall study the effects of the transfer, change, or amendment on habitat for
fish stocks listed or proposed for listing as threatened or endangered under
the federal endangered species act or as critical or depressed in the state's
salmon and steelhead stock inventory. If the proposed use would adversely
impact such habitat and the public water system does not withdraw the
application, the system shall develop a plan for mitigating the adverse impacts
and for monitoring the effectiveness of the mitigation effort. Any such
mitigation shall be conducted concurrently with the transfer, change, or
amendment of the right. This subsection includes, but is not limited to, any
change of the place of use for such an inchoate portion of a water right made
through an intertie.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
4. A new section is added
to chapter 90.03 RCW to read as follows:

(1) The department may
not approve any transfer or change of a water right held by a public water
system that changes the place of use for the right for beneficial use by a
public water system unless the conservation and efficiency measures and
safeguards for the distribution of water in the new place of use are at least
as stringent as the conservation and efficiency measures and safeguards
existing for the distribution of water by the system in the place of use for the
original water right before the transfer or change.

(2) This subsection
applies to any transfer or change of a water right that changes the place of
use of water so that it may be beneficially used by a public water system with
one thousand or more service connections. The department of ecology may not
approve such a transfer or change for a water right unless the system for
distributing water in the new place of use satisfies the standards and
safeguards adopted by the department of health under section 1 of this act.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
5. A new section is added
to chapter 90.44 RCW to read as follows:

If a water right
certificate was issued by the department of ecology before the effective date
of this section to a public water system and, at the time the certificate was
issued, the amount of water listed on the certificate as being subject to
withdrawal for use under the certificate included both amounts beneficially
used by the date of the issuance and amounts not yet beneficially used by that
date, the water right represented by the certificate is for the total of both
such amounts. Any amounts not yet beneficially used under such a certificate
by the effective date of this section are governed by the inchoate portion of
the water right and are available to a public water system holding the
certificated right for further development as prescribed in section 3 of this
act and for further development as prescribed in section 3 of this act through
the amendment of the right. The place of use for the water right represented
by such a certificate is the place of use listed on the certificate or the
place of use identified in the water system plan approved by the department of
health on the effective date of this section for the public water system,
whichever document identifies a larger service area for the public water
system.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
6. A new section is added
to chapter 90.44 RCW to read as follows:

(1) The department may
not approve any amendment of a water right held by a public water system that
changes the place of use for the right for beneficial use by a public water
system unless the conservation and efficiency measures and safeguards for the
distribution of water in the new place of use are at least as stringent as the
conservation and efficiency measures and safeguards existing for the
distribution of water by the system in the place of use for the original water
right before the amendment.

(2) This subsection
applies to any amendment of a water right that changes the place of use of
water so that it may be beneficially used by a public water system with one
thousand or more service connections. The department of ecology may not
approve such an amendment for a water right unless the system for distributing
water in the new place of use satisfies the standards and safeguards adopted by
the department of health under section 1 of this act.

Sec. 7. RCW 90.03.383 and 1991
c 350 s 1 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) The legislature
recognizes the value of interties for improving the reliability of public water
systems, enhancing their management, and more efficiently utilizing the
increasingly limited resource. Given the continued growth in the most populous
areas of the state, the increased complexity of public water supply management,
and the trend toward regional planning and regional solutions to resource
issues, interconnections of public water systems through interties provide a
valuable tool to ensure reliable public water supplies for the citizens of the
state. Public water systems have been encouraged in the past to utilize
interties to achieve public health and resource management objectives. The
legislature finds that it is in the public interest to recognize interties
existing and in use as of January 1, 1991, and to have associated water rights
modified by the department of ecology to reflect current use of water through
those interties, pursuant to subsection (3) of this section. The legislature
further finds it in the public interest to develop a coordinated process to
review proposals for interties commencing use after January 1, 1991.

(2) For the purposes of
this section, the following definitions shall apply:

(a)
"Interties" are interconnections between public water systems
permitting exchange, acquisition, or delivery of water between those
systems for other than emergency supply purposes, where such exchange or
delivery is within established instantaneous and annual withdrawal rates
specified in the systems' existing water right permits or certificates, or
contained in claims filed pursuant to chapter 90.14 RCW, and which results in
better management of public water supply consistent with existing rights and
obligations. Interties include interconnections between public water systems
permitting exchange, acquisition, or delivery of water to serve as
primary or secondary sources of supply((, but do not include development of
new sources of supply to meet future demand)).

(b) "Service
area" is the area designated in a water system plan or a coordinated water
system plan pursuant to chapter 43.20 or 70.116 RCW respectively. When a
public water system does not have a designated service area subject to the
approval process of those chapters, the service area shall be the designated
place of use contained in the water right permit or certificate, or contained
in the claim filed pursuant to chapter 90.14 RCW.

(3) Public water systems
with interties existing and in use as of January 1, 1991, or that have received
written approval from the department of health prior to that date, shall file
written notice of those interties with the department of health and the
department of ecology. The notice may be incorporated into the public water
system's five-year update of its water system plan, but shall be filed no later
than June 30, 1996. The notice shall identify the location of the intertie;
the dates of its first use; the purpose, capacity, and current use; the
intertie agreement of the parties and the service areas assigned; and other
information reasonably necessary to modify the water right permit.
Notwithstanding the provisions of RCW 90.03.380 and 90.44.100, for public water
systems with interties existing and in use as of January 1, 1991, the
department of ecology, upon receipt of notice meeting the requirements of this
subsection, shall, as soon as practicable, modify the place of use descriptions
in the water right permits, certificates, or claims to reflect the actual use
through such interties, provided that the place of use is within service area
designations established in a water system plan approved pursuant to chapter
43.20 RCW, or a coordinated water system plan approved pursuant to chapter
70.116 RCW, and further provided that the water used is within the
instantaneous and annual withdrawal rates specified in the water right permit
and that no outstanding complaints of impairment to existing water rights have
been filed with the department of ecology prior to September 1, 1991. Where
such complaints of impairment have been received, the department of ecology
shall make all reasonable efforts to resolve them in a timely manner through
agreement of the parties or through available administrative remedies.

(4) Notwithstanding the
provisions of RCW 90.03.380 and 90.44.100, exchange or delivery of water
through interties commencing use after January 1, 1991, shall be permitted when
the intertie improves overall system reliability, enhances the manageability of
the systems, provides opportunities for conjunctive use, or delays or avoids
the need to develop new water sources, and otherwise meets the requirements of
this section, provided that each public water system's water use shall not
exceed the instantaneous or annual withdrawal rate specified in its water right
authorization, shall not adversely affect existing water rights, and shall not
be inconsistent with state-approved plans such as water system plans or other
plans which include specific proposals for construction of interties.
Interties commencing use after January 1, 1991, shall not be inconsistent with
regional water resource plans developed pursuant to chapter 90.54 RCW.

(5) For public water
systems subject to the approval process of chapter 43.20 RCW or chapter 70.116
RCW, proposals for interties commencing use after January 1, 1991, shall be
incorporated into water system plans pursuant to chapter 43.20 RCW or
coordinated water system plans pursuant to chapter 70.116 RCW and submitted to
the department of health and the department of ecology for review and approval
as provided for in subsections (5) through (9) of this section. The plan shall
state how the proposed intertie will improve overall system reliability,
enhance the manageability of the systems, provide opportunities for conjunctive
use, or delay or avoid the need to develop new water sources.

(6) The department of
health shall be responsible for review and approval of proposals for new
interties. In its review the department of health shall determine whether the
intertie satisfies the criteria of subsection (4) of this section, with the
exception of water rights considerations, which are the responsibility of the
department of ecology, and shall determine whether the intertie is necessary to
address emergent public health or safety concerns associated with public water
supply.

(7) If the intertie is
determined by the department of health to be necessary to address emergent
public health or safety concerns associated with public water supply, the
public water system shall amend its water system plan as required and shall
file an application with the department of ecology to change its existing water
right to reflect the proposed use of the water as described in the approved
water system plan. The department of ecology shall process the application for
change pursuant to RCW 90.03.380 or 90.44.100 as appropriate, except that,
notwithstanding the requirements of those sections regarding notice and protest
periods, applicants shall be required to publish notice one time, and the
comment period shall be fifteen days from the date of publication of the
notice. Within sixty days of receiving the application, the department of
ecology shall issue findings and advise the department of health if existing
water rights are determined to be adversely affected. If no determination is
provided by the department of ecology within the sixty-day period, the
department of health shall proceed as if existing rights are not adversely
affected by the proposed intertie. The department of ecology may obtain an
extension of the sixty-day period by submitting written notice to the
department of health and to the applicant indicating a definite date by which
its determination will be made. No additional extensions shall be granted, and
in no event shall the total review period for the department of ecology exceed
one hundred eighty days.

(8) If the department
of health determines the proposed intertie appears to meet the requirements of
subsection (4) of this section but is not necessary to address emergent public
health or safety concerns associated with public water supply, the department
of health shall instruct the applicant to submit to the department of ecology
an application for change to the underlying water right or claim as necessary
to reflect the new place of use. The department of ecology shall consider the
applications pursuant to the provisions of RCW 90.03.380 and 90.44.100 as
appropriate. If in its review of proposed interties and associated water
rights the department of ecology determines that additional information is
required to act on the application, the department may request applicants to
provide information necessary for its decision, consistent with agency rules
and written guidelines. Parties disagreeing with the decision of the
department of ecology on the application for change in place of use may appeal
the decision to the pollution control hearings board.

(9) The department of
health may approve plans containing intertie proposals prior to the department
of ecology's decision on the water right application for change in place of
use. However, notwithstanding such approval, construction work on the intertie
shall not begin until the department of ecology issues the appropriate water
right document to the applicant consistent with the approved plan.

(10) An
intertie may not be used to deliver a primary or secondary supply of water to a
receiving system on a temporary basis unless the terms of the intertie
agreement specify the source of the water that will be used by the receiving
system to replace the water delivered on the temporary basis, and provide that
replacement water will be available for delivery to, or use by, the receiving
system before delivery by the supplying system under the agreement is
terminated. However, if a primary or secondary supply of water is delivered to
a receiving system on a temporary basis by means of an intertie on the
effective date of this section and the agreement between the supplying system
and receiving system does not contain such provision for such a replacement
supply of water for the receiving system, the delivery of the water by the
supplying system to the receiving system may not be terminated until the agreement
is modified to establish such provisions, and such replacement water is
available for delivery to or use by the receiving system.

---
END ---