BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF
WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec.
1. A new section is added
to chapter 90.03 RCW to read as follows:

It is in the public
interest for municipal water suppliers to be able to use water resources to
meet the current and future water supply needs of the public generally and to
achieve the objectives of the state's growth management act, chapter 36.70A
RCW, where applicable. A growing communities doctrine, that acknowledges the
distinctive role of municipal water suppliers to maintain sufficient water to
support future growth within the state, has been implicitly recognized in our
statutes and is hereby explicitly adopted. Accordingly, the legislature
declares that water rights shall be interpreted and administered in recognition
of the distinctive role and legal duties that municipal water suppliers have to
serve growing communities, specifically including but not limited to the
following: Municipal water suppliers may acquire and retain water rights for
reasonably anticipated future needs; water rights held by municipal water
suppliers shall have a place of use consistent with applicable growth
management and water system planning statutes; and reasonable diligence for
fully developing new and existing water rights held by municipal water
suppliers shall be interpreted consistent with the needs of growing communities
for reasonable assurance of continued future water supply. It is further the
intent of the legislature that municipal water suppliers shall comply with
applicable environmental laws and rules, including those that provide for
protection of fish habitat, and applicable state water conservation
requirements.

Sec. 2. RCW 90.03.015 and 1987 c
109 s 65 are each amended to read as follows:

As used in this chapter
and chapters 90.14 and 90.44 RCW:

(1)
"Department" means the department of ecology;

(2)
"Director" means the director of ecology; ((and))

(3) "Municipal
water supplier" means a purveyor, as defined in RCW 70.116.030(4), that is
either: (a) A municipal corporation; or (b) an entity that (i) owns or
operates a public water system that is entitled or obligated to serve existing
and additional customers and uses within one or more approved water service
areas to the extent such customers and uses are allowed under an applicable
land use plan, and (ii) has an approved water system plan pursuant to chapter
43.20 RCW that includes supplies of water for domestic use, commercial use, and
use by publicly owned institutions or structures;

(4) "Municipal
water supply purposes" means any use for which water is or is anticipated
to be provided by a municipal water supplier; and

(5)
"Person" means any firm, association, water users' association, corporation,
irrigation district, or municipal corporation, as well as an individual.

Sec. 3. RCW 90.03.330 and 1987 c
109 s 89 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) Upon a
showing satisfactory to the department that any appropriation has been
perfected in accordance with the provisions of this chapter, it shall be the
duty of the department to issue to the applicant a certificate stating such
facts in a form to be prescribed by ((him)) the director, and
such certificate shall thereupon be recorded with the department. Any original
water right certificate issued, as provided by this chapter, shall be recorded
with the department and thereafter, at the expense of the party receiving the
same, be by the department transmitted to the county auditor of the county or
counties where the distributing system or any part thereof is located, and be
recorded in the office of such county auditor, and thereafter be transmitted to
the owner thereof.

(2) A water right
certificate issued before the effective date of this act and held by a
municipal water supplier is a right in good standing where: (a) The water has
been applied to beneficial use; or (b) the water is to be used for reasonably
anticipated future needs.

(3) Except as set
forth in RCW 90.03.240, the department shall not rescind or reissue any water
right certificate without the consent of the water right holder. Nothing in
this section prohibits the department from correcting ministerial errors in a
water right certificate. Nor shall this section be construed to prohibit the
department from issuing a certificate pursuant to RCW 90.03.380 or an amendment
pursuant to RCW 90.44.100, when the certificate holder applies to the
department for a transfer or change pursuant to RCW 90.03.380 or for an
amendment pursuant to RCW 90.44.100.

Sec. 4. RCW 90.03.460 and 1917 c
117 s 43 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) Nothing in
this chapter contained shall operate to effect an impairment of any inchoate
right to divert and use water while the application of the water in question to
a beneficial use is being prosecuted with reasonable diligence, having due
regard to the circumstances surrounding the enterprise, including the magnitude
of the project for putting the water to a beneficial use and the market for the
resulting water right for irrigation or power or other beneficial use, in the
locality in question.

(2) A municipal
water supplier prosecutes its water right with reasonable diligence when the
right has been or is identified to meet existing or reasonably anticipated
future needs in an approved water system plan pursuant to chapter 43.20 RCW or
an approved coordinated water system plan pursuant to chapter 70.116 RCW. This
subsection shall not be interpreted to limit or exclude other methods or means
of prosecuting a water right with reasonable diligence, including, without
limitation, installed system capacity.

(3) Municipal water
suppliers shall have a minimum of fifty years from the latest approval of a
plan identified in subsection (2) of this section to put to use their water
rights identified for reasonably anticipated future use. Municipal water
suppliers may have additional time based on the particular facts and
circumstances, including, without limitation, the size and nature of the water
diversion or conveyance project, projected useful life of facilities, size and
nature of service areas, growth projections, system interconnections, water
conservation, and financing requirements.

Sec. 5. RCW 90.03.386 and 1991 c
350 s 2 are each amended to read as follows:

Within service areas
established pursuant to chapters 43.20 and 70.116 RCW, the department of
ecology and the department of health shall coordinate approval procedures to
ensure compliance and consistency with the approved water system plan. For
water appropriations held by a municipal water supplier, the place of use shall
be the water service areas in the municipal water supplier's water system plan
approved pursuant to chapter 43.20 RCW or coordinated water system plan
approved pursuant to chapter 70.116 RCW, as either plan may be amended from
time to time.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
6. A new section is added
to chapter 43.20 RCW to read as follows:

The
department of health shall adopt as rules conservation and water system
efficiency standards and safeguards that shall apply to municipal water
suppliers. The standards shall apply to a municipal water supplier that has at
least one thousand service connections.

---
END ---