BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF
WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec.
1. A new section is added
to chapter 43.20 RCW to read as follows:

(1)(a) Each year, the
department of health shall determine the volume of water annually withdrawn by
each public water system with one thousand or more service connections and
shall determine the annual average amount of water withdrawn per service
connection in the system. The secretary of health may adjust the average as
described in subsection (2) of this section. The department shall group the
systems by geographic areas with similar climatological characteristics and,
using these averages and adjusted averages as appropriate, shall determine the
annual average amount of water withdrawn per service connection in each such
group. This average for the public water systems in each geographic group
constitutes the water withdrawal target rate for the group. The department
shall publish these target rates annually.

(b) Each water system
plan of a public water system with one thousand or more connections submitted
to the department of health for approval shall be for a six-year planning
period. Beginning January 1, 2004, a water system plan for a public water
system with one thousand or more service connections shall contain provisions
identifying how the annual average amount of water withdrawn per service
connection by the system, as adjusted under subsection (2) of this section,
will meet, during the six-year life of the plan, a water withdrawal target rate
published under (a) of this subsection for the system's geographic group for
either of the two calendar years preceding the system's submission of the plan
to the department of health for approval. The department of health shall not
approve a water system plan for such a system unless the plan identifies how
the system will meet the water withdrawal target rate during the six-year life
of the plan. If a water system plan for such water system has been approved by
the department as satisfying the requirements of this section, the department
shall not approve a subsequent water system plan for such system until the
withdrawal target rate of the approved plan has been met by the system.

(2) If the secretary of
health determines that the use of water provided by a public water system is
dominated by one or more very large commercial or industrial users such that
the annual average of the amount of water withdrawn per service connection by
the system calculated by the department under subsection (1)(a) of this section
is quite different than it would be, considering water use rates by each
category of use, if the commercial or industrial water use were not so
disproportionate to other uses, the secretary may adjust the annual average
calculated for the water system to compensate for the disproportionate use. The
secretary shall adopt rules identifying the circumstances under which such
adjustments may be made and how they may be made.

(3) The department of
health shall provide enhanced technical assistance to public water systems that
are developing water system plans to meet water withdrawal target rates. The
objective of the enhanced support is to assist the systems in identifying and
evaluating tools and techniques that might be used to meet the target rates.

(4) For the purposes of
this section, a public water system that achieves a water withdrawal rate under
which the annual average of the amount of water withdrawn per service
connection by the system is equal to or less than the water withdrawal target
rate applicable to the system's water system plan has achieved the water
withdrawal target rate applicable to the plan. Similarly, a plan for achieving
an annual average of the amount of water withdrawn per service connection that
is equal to or less than the water withdrawal target rate applicable to the plan
is a plan for achieving the water withdrawal target rate applicable to the
plan.

(5) For the purposes of
subsections (1) and (2) of this section, a water "withdrawal" means
both a water diversion and a water withdrawal and water "withdrawn"
refers to both water diverted and water withdrawn.

Sec. 2. RCW 90.03.383 and 1991 c
350 s 1 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) The legislature
recognizes the value of interties for improving the reliability of public water
systems, enhancing their management, and more efficiently utilizing the
increasingly limited resource. Given the continued growth in the most populous
areas of the state, the increased complexity of public water supply management,
and the trend toward regional planning and regional solutions to resource
issues, interconnections of public water systems through interties provide a
valuable tool to ensure reliable public water supplies for the citizens of the
state. Public water systems have been encouraged in the past to utilize
interties to achieve public health and resource management objectives. The
legislature finds that it is in the public interest to recognize interties
existing and in use as of January 1, 1991, and to have associated water rights
modified by the department of ecology to reflect current use of water through
those interties, pursuant to subsection (3) of this section. The legislature
further finds it in the public interest to develop a coordinated process to
review proposals for interties commencing use after January 1, 1991.

(2) For the purposes of
this section, the following definitions shall apply:

(a)
"Interties" are interconnections between public water systems
permitting exchange, acquisition, or delivery of water between those
systems for other than emergency supply purposes, where such exchange or
delivery is within established instantaneous and annual withdrawal rates
specified in the systems' existing water right permits or certificates, or
contained in claims filed pursuant to chapter 90.14 RCW, and which results in
better management of public water supply consistent with existing rights and
obligations. Interties include interconnections between public water systems
permitting exchange, acquisition, or delivery of water to serve as
primary or secondary sources of supply((, but do not include development of
new sources of supply to meet future demand)).

(b) "Service
area" is the area designated in a water system plan or a coordinated water
system plan pursuant to chapter 43.20 or 70.116 RCW respectively. When a
public water system does not have a designated service area subject to the
approval process of those chapters, the service area shall be the designated
place of use contained in the water right permit or certificate, or contained
in the claim filed pursuant to chapter 90.14 RCW.

(3) Public water
systems with interties existing and in use as of January 1, 1991, or that have
received written approval from the department of health prior to that date,
shall file written notice of those interties with the department of health and
the department of ecology. The notice may be incorporated into the public
water system's five-year update of its water system plan, but shall be filed no
later than June 30, 1996. The notice shall identify the location of the
intertie; the dates of its first use; the purpose, capacity, and current use;
the intertie agreement of the parties and the service areas assigned; and other
information reasonably necessary to modify the water right permit.
Notwithstanding the provisions of RCW 90.03.380 and 90.44.100, for public water
systems with interties existing and in use as of January 1, 1991, the
department of ecology, upon receipt of notice meeting the requirements of this
subsection, shall, as soon as practicable, modify the place of use descriptions
in the water right permits, certificates, or claims to reflect the actual use
through such interties, provided that the place of use is within service area
designations established in a water system plan approved pursuant to chapter
43.20 RCW, or a coordinated water system plan approved pursuant to chapter
70.116 RCW, and further provided that the water used is within the
instantaneous and annual withdrawal rates specified in the water right permit
and that no outstanding complaints of impairment to existing water rights have
been filed with the department of ecology prior to September 1, 1991. Where
such complaints of impairment have been received, the department of ecology
shall make all reasonable efforts to resolve them in a timely manner through
agreement of the parties or through available administrative remedies.

(4) Notwithstanding the
provisions of RCW 90.03.380 and 90.44.100, exchange or delivery of water through
interties commencing use after January 1, 1991, shall be permitted when the
intertie improves overall system reliability, enhances the manageability of the
systems, provides opportunities for conjunctive use, or delays or avoids the
need to develop new water sources, and otherwise meets the requirements of this
section, provided that each public water system's water use shall not exceed
the instantaneous or annual withdrawal rate specified in its water right
authorization, shall not adversely affect existing water rights, and shall not
be inconsistent with state-approved plans such as water system plans or other
plans which include specific proposals for construction of interties.
Interties commencing use after January 1, 1991, shall not be inconsistent with
regional water resource plans developed pursuant to chapter 90.54 RCW.

(5) For public water
systems subject to the approval process of chapter 43.20 RCW or chapter 70.116
RCW, proposals for interties commencing use after January 1, 1991, shall be
incorporated into water system plans pursuant to chapter 43.20 RCW or
coordinated water system plans pursuant to chapter 70.116 RCW and submitted to
the department of health and the department of ecology for review and approval
as provided for in subsections (5) through (9) of this section. The plan shall
state how the proposed intertie will improve overall system reliability,
enhance the manageability of the systems, provide opportunities for conjunctive
use, or delay or avoid the need to develop new water sources.

(6) The department of
health shall be responsible for review and approval of proposals for new
interties. In its review the department of health shall determine whether the
intertie satisfies the criteria of subsection (4) of this section, with the
exception of water rights considerations, which are the responsibility of the
department of ecology, and shall determine whether the intertie is necessary to
address emergent public health or safety concerns associated with public water
supply.

(7) If the intertie is
determined by the department of health to be necessary to address emergent
public health or safety concerns associated with public water supply, the
public water system shall amend its water system plan as required and shall
file an application with the department of ecology to change its existing water
right to reflect the proposed use of the water as described in the approved
water system plan. The department of ecology shall process the application for
change pursuant to RCW 90.03.380 or 90.44.100 as appropriate, except that,
notwithstanding the requirements of those sections regarding notice and protest
periods, applicants shall be required to publish notice one time, and the
comment period shall be fifteen days from the date of publication of the
notice. Within sixty days of receiving the application, the department of
ecology shall issue findings and advise the department of health if existing
water rights are determined to be adversely affected. If no determination is
provided by the department of ecology within the sixty-day period, the
department of health shall proceed as if existing rights are not adversely
affected by the proposed intertie. The department of ecology may obtain an
extension of the sixty-day period by submitting written notice to the
department of health and to the applicant indicating a definite date by which
its determination will be made. No additional extensions shall be granted, and
in no event shall the total review period for the department of ecology exceed
one hundred eighty days.

(8) If the department
of health determines the proposed intertie appears to meet the requirements of
subsection (4) of this section but is not necessary to address emergent public
health or safety concerns associated with public water supply, the department
of health shall instruct the applicant to submit to the department of ecology
an application for change to the underlying water right or claim as necessary
to reflect the new place of use. The department of ecology shall consider the
applications pursuant to the provisions of RCW 90.03.380 and 90.44.100 as
appropriate. If in its review of proposed interties and associated water
rights the department of ecology determines that additional information is
required to act on the application, the department may request applicants to
provide information necessary for its decision, consistent with agency rules
and written guidelines. Parties disagreeing with the decision of the
department of ecology on the application for change in place of use may appeal
the decision to the pollution control hearings board.

(9) The department of
health may approve plans containing intertie proposals prior to the department
of ecology's decision on the water right application for change in place of
use. However, notwithstanding such approval, construction work on the intertie
shall not begin until the department of ecology issues the appropriate water
right document to the applicant consistent with the approved plan.

(10) An
intertie may not be used to deliver a primary or secondary supply of water to a
receiving system on a temporary basis unless the terms of the intertie
agreement specify the source of the water that will be used by the receiving
system to replace the water delivered on the temporary basis, and provide that
replacement water will be available for delivery to, or use by, the receiving
system before delivery by the supplying system under the agreement is
terminated. However, if a primary or secondary supply of water is delivered to
a receiving system on a temporary basis by means of an intertie on the
effective date of this section and the agreement between the supplying system
and receiving system does not contain such provision for such a replacement
supply of water for the receiving system, the delivery of the water by the
supplying system to the receiving system may not be terminated until the
agreement is modified to establish such provisions, and such replacement water
is available for delivery to or use by the receiving system.

---
END ---