BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF
WASHINGTON:

_7 NEW SECTION. Sec. 1. The legislature
hereby establishes a pilot

_8 project for purposes of evaluating means of reducing the
current

_9 backlog of applications for changes, transfers, or
amendments of

10 existing water rights. For the purposes of this pilot
project, the

11 legislature intends to allow the processing of
applications for

12 such changes, transfers, or amendments without regard to
possible

13 impairment of pending applications for new water rights
in

14 specific watersheds. While the legislature intends to
assist the

15 processing of such changes, transfers, and amendments,
it does not

16 intend to divert the department of ecology's efforts or
in any

17 other way deter the processing of applications for new
water

18 rights.

p. 1 HB
1877

_1 This section is null and void if any one of sections
4 through

_2 10 of this act is vetoed by June 30, 2001.

_3 Sec. 2. RCW
90.03.380 and 1997 c 442 s 801 are each amended to

_4 read as follows:

_5 (1) The right to the use of water which has been
applied to a

_6 beneficial use in the state shall be and remain
appurtenant to the

_7 land or place upon which the same is used: PROVIDED,
HOWEVER, That

_8 the right may be transferred to another or to others and
become

_9 appurtenant to any other land or place of use without
loss of

10 priority of right theretofore established if such change
can be

11 made without detriment or injury to existing rights.
The point of

12 diversion of water for beneficial use or the purpose of
use may be

13 changed, if such change can be made without detriment or
injury to

14 existing rights.

15 (a) A change in the place of use, point of
diversion, and/or

16 purpose of use of a water right to enable irrigation of
additional

17 acreage or the addition of new uses may be permitted if
such

18 change results in no increase in the annual consumptive
quantity

19 of water used under the water right. For purposes of
this section,

20 "annual consumptive quantity" means the
estimated or actual annual

21 amount of water diverted pursuant to the water right,
reduced by

22 the estimated annual amount of return flows, averaged
over the

23 most recent five-year period of continuous beneficial
use of the

24 water right.

25 (b) Before any transfer of such right to use
water or change of

26 the point of diversion of water or change of purpose of
use can be

27 made, any person having an interest in the transfer or
change,

28 shall file a written application therefor with the
department, and

29 the application shall not be granted until notice of the

30 application is published as provided in RCW 90.03.280.
If it shall

31 appear that such transfer or such change may be made
without

32 injury or detriment to existing rights, the department
shall issue

33 to the applicant a certificate in duplicate granting the
right for

34 such transfer or for such change of point of diversion
or of use.

35 The certificate so issued shall be filed and be made a
record with

36 the department and the duplicate certificate issued to
the

HB 1877 p. 2

_1 applicant may be filed with the county auditor in like
manner and

_2 with the same effect as provided in the original
certificate or

_3 permit to divert water.

_4 (2) If an application for change proposes to
transfer water

_5 rights from one irrigation district to another, the
department

_6 shall, before publication of notice, receive concurrence
from each

_7 of the irrigation districts that such transfer or change
will not

_8 adversely affect the ability to deliver water to other
landowners

_9 or impair the financial integrity of either of the
districts.

10 (3) A change in place of use by an individual water
user or

11 users of water provided by an irrigation district need
only

12 receive approval for the change from the board of
directors of the

13 district if the use of water continues within the
irrigation

14 district, and when water is provided by an irrigation
entity that

15 is a member of a board of joint control created under
chapter

16 87.80 RCW, approval need only be received from the board
of joint

17 control if the use of water continues within the area of

18 jurisdiction of the joint board and the change can be
made without

19 detriment or injury to existing rights.

20 (4) This section shall not apply to trust water
rights acquired

21 by the state through the funding of water conservation
projects

22 under chapter 90.38 RCW or RCW 90.42.010 through

23 90.42.070. Subsection (1)(a) of this section does
not apply to and

24 shall not be construed as providing any limitation to
the

25 transfers, changes, or amendments of water rights
established

26 under the authority of a family farm permit that are
authorized

27 under section 11 of this act.

28 (5) Pending applications for new water rights are
not entitled

29 to protection from impairment, injury, or detriment
when an

30 application for a change, transfer, or amendment of
an existing

31 surface or ground water right is considered.

32 (6) Applications relating to existing surface or
ground water

33 rights may be processed and decisions on them
rendered

34 independently of processing and rendering decisions
on pending

35 applications for new water rights within the same
source of supply

36 without regard to the date of filing of the pending
applications

37 for new water rights.

38 (7) An application may be processed ahead of a
previously filed

p. 3 HB
1877

_1 application, when sufficient information for a
decision on the

_2 previously filed application is not available and the
applicant

_3 for the previously filed application is sent written
notice that

_4 explains what information is not available and why
and informs the

_5 applicant that processing of the next application in
order of

_6 filing will begin. No such previously filed
application shall lose

_7 its priority date. This subsection does not affect
any other

_8 existing authority to process applications.

_9 (8) No applicant for a change, transfer, or
amendment of a

10 surface or ground water right may be required to give
up any part

11 of the applicant's valid water right or claim to a
state agency,

12 the trust water rights program, or to other persons,
as a

13 condition of processing or approving the application.

14 (9) As used in this section, "WRIA"
means a water resource

15 inventory area established in chapter 173-500 WAC as
it existed on

16 January 1, 2001.

17 (10) Subsections (5) through (12) of this section
provide the

18 pilot project referred to in section 1 of this act
and apply only

19 in WRIA's 1, 6, 13, 23, 32, 37, 39, 47, and 48 and in
the ground

20 water management subarea described in chapter
173-128A WAC.

21 (11) Beginning January 1, 2002, the department shall
report to

22 the legislature by January 1st and by June 30th of
each year on

23 the results to date of the pilot project.

24 (12) Subsections (5) through (12) of this section
are in effect

25 beginning the effective date of this section through
June 30,

26 2004.

27 (13) The 2001 amendments to this section are null
and void if

28 any one of sections 4 through 10 of this act is
vetoed by June 30,

29 2001.

30 NEW SECTION. Sec. 3. The expiration of the
pilot project

31 authorized by section 2 (5) through (11) of this act
shall not

32 affect any right acquired or liability or obligation
incurred or

33 any rule or order adopted or decision made under section
2 (5)

34 through (11) of this act nor shall it affect any proceeding

35 instituted under or with regard to section 2 (5) through
(11) of

36 this act.

HB 1877 p. 4

_1 This section is null and void if any one of sections
4 through

_2 10 of this act is vetoed by June 30, 2001.

_3 Sec. 4. RCW
90.80.010 and 1997 c 441 s 2 are each amended to read

_4 as follows:

_5 The following definitions apply throughout this
chapter, unless

_6 the context clearly requires otherwise.

_7 (1) "Board" means a water conservancy
board created under this

_8 chapter.

_9 (2) "Commissioner" means a member of a
water conservancy board.

10 (3) "Department" means the department of
ecology.

11 (4) "Director" means the director of the
department of ecology.

12 (5) "Transfer" means a transfer, change,
or amendment to a

13 water right referred to in RCW 90.03.380, 90.03.390,
or 90.44.100.

14 Sec. 5. RCW
90.80.070 and 1997 c 441 s 9 are each amended to read

15 as follows:

16 (1) Applications to the board for transfers shall be
made on a

17 form provided by the department, and shall contain such
additional

18 information as may be required by the board in order to
review and

19 act upon the application. At a minimum, the application
shall

20 include information sufficient to establish to the
board's

21 satisfaction of the transferor's right to the quantity
of water

22 being transferred, and a description of any applicable
limitations

23 on the right to use water, including the point of
diversion or

24 withdrawal, place of use, source of supply, purpose of
use,

25 quantity of use permitted, time of use, period of use,
and the

26 place of storage.

27 (2) The transferor and the transferee of any
proposed water

28 transfer may apply to a board for approval of the
transfer if the

29 water proposed to be transferred is currently diverted,
withdrawn,

30 or used within the geographic boundaries of the county,
or would

31 be diverted, withdrawn, or used within the
geographic boundaries

32 of the county if the transfer is approved. In the case
of a

33 proposed water transfer in which the water is currently
diverted

34 or would be diverted outside the geographic boundaries
of the

35 county, the board shall hold a public hearing in the
county of the

36 diversion or proposed diversion. The board shall
provide for

p. 5 HB
1877

_1 prominent publication of notice of such hearing in a
newspaper of

_2 general circulation published in the county in which the
hearing

_3 is to be held for the purpose of affording an
opportunity for

_4 interested persons to comment upon the application.

_5 (3) After an application for a transfer is filed
with the

_6 board, the board shall publish notice of the application
in

_7 accordance with the publication requirements and send
notice to

_8 state agencies as provided in RCW 90.03.280. Any person
may submit

_9 comments to the board regarding the application. Any
water right

10 holder claiming detriment or injury to an existing water
right may

11 intervene in the application before the board pursuant
to

12 subsection (4) of this section. If a majority of the
board

13 determines that the application is complete, in
accordance with

14 the law and the transfer can be made without injury or detriment

15 to existing water rights in accordance with RCW
90.03.380,

16 90.03.390, or 90.44.100, the board shall issue
the applicant a

17 certificate conditionally approving the transfer,
subject to

18 review by the director.

19 (4) If a water right holder claims a proposed
transfer will

20 cause an impairment to that right, the water right
holder is

21 entitled to a hearing before the board. The board shall
receive

22 such evidence as it deems material and necessary to
determine the

23 validity of the claim of impairment. If the party
claiming the

24 impairment establishes by a preponderance of the
evidence that his

25 or her water right will be impaired by the proposed
transfer, the

26 board may not approve the transfer unless the applicant
and the

27 impaired party agree upon compensation for the
impairment.

28 Sec. 6. RCW
90.80.080 and 1997 c 441 s 11 are each amended to

29 read as follows:

30 (1) If an application for a transfer is
approved by the board,

31 the board shall submit a copy of the proposed
certificate

32 conditionally approving the transfer to the department
for

33 review. The board shall also submit a report
summarizing any

34 factual findings on which the board relied in deciding
to approve

35 the proposed transfer. The board shall also transmit
notice of the

36 board's decision by mail to any person who
objected to the

37 transfer or who requested notice.

HB 1877 p. 6

_1 If an application for a transfer is denied by the
board, the

_2 board shall submit a copy of a record of its decision
denying the

_3 transfer to the department for review. The board
shall also submit

_4 a report summarizing any factual findings on which
the board

_5 relied in deciding to deny the proposed transfer.
The board shall

_6 also transmit notice of the board's decision by mail
to any person

_7 who objected to the transfer or who requested notice.

_8 (2) The director shall review each proposed transfer

_9 conditionally approved by a board and each decision
by a board

10 denying an application for such a transfer for
compliance or

11 noncompliance with state water transfer laws
including RCW

12 90.03.380, 90.03.390, and 90.44.100, rules and
guidelines adopted

13 by the department, and other applicable law.

14 (3) Any party to a transfer or a third party who
alleges his or

15 her water right will be impaired by the proposed
transfer may file

16 objections with the department. If objections to the
transfer are

17 filed with the department, the board shall forward the
files and

18 records upon which it based its decision to the
department.

19 (4) The director shall review the action of the
board and

20 affirm, reverse, or modify the action of the board
within forty-

21 five days of receipt. The forty-five day time period
may be

22 extended for an additional thirty days by the director,
upon the

23 consent of the parties to the transfer. If the director
fails to

24 act within this time period, the board's action is
final. Upon

25 approval of a water transfer by the action or nonaction
of the

26 director, the conditional certificate issued by the
board is final

27 and valid.

28 NEW SECTION. Sec. 7. A new section is
added to chapter 90.80

29 RCW to read as follows:

30 No action may be brought or maintained against a
commissioner,

31 agent, or employee of a water conservancy board for any

32 noncontractual acts or omissions of the water
conservancy board or

33 its commissioners, agents, or employees which are related
to water

34 transfers under this chapter.

35 Sec. 8. RCW
90.80.100 and 1997 c 441 s 13 are each amended to read

36 as follows:

p. 7 HB
1877

_1 ((Neither)) The county ((nor)),
the water conservancy board,

_2 and the department shall not be subject jointly
or severally to

_3 any cause of action or claim for damages arising out of
transfers

_4 approved or denied by a board under this chapter.

_5

_6 Sec. 9. RCW
90.80.120 and 1997 c 441 s 16 are each amended to read

_7 as follows:

_8 (1) A commissioner of a water conservancy board who
has an

_9 ownership interest in a water right subject to an
application for

10 approval of a transfer ((or change)) by the board,
shall not

11 participate in the board's review or decision upon the

12 application.

13 (2) A commissioner of a water conservancy board who
also serves

14 as an employee or upon the governing body of a
municipally owned

15 water system, shall not participate in the board's
review or

16 decision upon an application for the transfer ((or
change)) of a

17 water right in which that water system has or is
proposed to have

18 an ownership interest.

19 Sec. 10. RCW
90.80.140 and 1997 c 441 s 18 are each amended to

20 read as follows:

21 Nothing in this chapter affects transfers that may
be otherwise

22 approved under chapter 90.03 or 90.44 RCW.

23 NEW SECTION. Sec. 11. A new section is
added to chapter 90.66

24 RCW to read as follows:

25 (1) Transfers of water rights established under the
authority

26 of family farm permits may be approved as authorized
under this

27 section and under RCW 90.03.380, 90.03.390, or 90.44.100
as

28 appropriate.

29 (2) A water right established under the authority of
a family

30 farm permit may be transferred:

31 (a) For use for agricultural irrigation purposes as
limited by

32 RCW 90.66.060 (1) and (2) except as provided in RCW
90.66.060(3);

33 (b) To any purpose of use that is a beneficial use
of water if

34 the transfer is made exclusively under a lease
agreement, except

35 that transfers for the use of water for agricultural
irrigation

HB 1877 p. 8

_1 purposes shall be limited as provided by RCW 90.66.060
(1) and

_2 (2);

_3 (c) To any purpose of use that is a beneficial use
of water if

_4 the water right is for the use of water at a location
that is,

_5 immediately before the transfer is approved, within the
boundaries

_6 of a city or town or within the boundaries of an urban
growth area

_7 designated under chapter 36.70A RCW, except that
transfers for the

_8 use of water for agricultural irrigation purposes shall
be limited

_9 as provided by RCW 90.66.060 (1) and (2).

10 (3) If a portion of the water governed by a water
right

11 established under the authority of a family farm permit
is made

12 surplus to the beneficial uses exercised under the right
through

13 the implementation of practices or technologies,
including but not

14 limited to conveyance practices or technologies, which
are more

15 efficient or more water-use efficient than those under
which the

16 right was perfected, the right to use the surplus water
may be

17 transferred to any purpose of use that is a beneficial
use of

18 water. Nothing in this subsection authorizes: A
transfer of the

19 portion of a water right that is necessary for the
production of

20 crops historically grown under the right; or a transfer
of a water

21 right or a portion of a water right that has not been
perfected

22 through beneficial use before the transfer.

23 (4) The authority granted by this section to
transfer or alter

24 the purpose of use of a water right established under
the

25 authority of a family farm permit shall not be construed
as

26 limiting in any manner the authority granted by RCW
90.03.380,

27 90.03.390, or 90.44.100 to alter other elements of such
a water

28 right.

29 Sec. 12. RCW
90.66.040 and 1979 c 3 s 4 are each amended to read as

30 follows:

31 For the purposes of this chapter, the following
definitions

32 shall be applicable:

33 (1) "Family farm" means a geographic area
including not more

34 than two thousand acres of irrigated agricultural lands,
whether

35 contiguous or noncontiguous, the controlling interest in
which is

36 held by a person having a controlling interest in no
more than two

p. 9 HB
1877

_1 thousand acres of irrigated agricultural lands in the
state of

_2 Washington which are irrigated under rights acquired
after

_3 December 8, 1977.

_4 (2) "Person" means any individual,
corporation, partnership,

_5 limited partnership, organization, or other entity
whatsoever,

_6 whether public or private. The term "person"
shall include as one

_7 person all corporate or partnership entities with a
common

_8 ownership of more than one-half of the assets of each of
any

_9 number of such entities.

10 (3) "Controlling interest" means a
property interest that can

11 be transferred to another person, the percentage
interest so

12 transferred being sufficient to effect a change in
control of the

13 landlord's rights and benefits. Ownership of property
held in trust

14 shall not be deemed a controlling interest where no part
of the

15 trust has been established through expenditure or
assignment of

16 assets of the beneficiary of the trust and where the
rights of the

17 family farm permit which is a part of the trust cannot
be

18 transferred to another by the beneficiary of the trust
under terms

19 of the trust. Each trust of a separate donor origin
shall be

20 treated as a separate entity and the administration of
property

21 under trust shall not represent a controlling interest
on the part

22 of the trust officer.

23 (4) "Department" means the department of
ecology of the state

24 of Washington.

25 (5) "Application", "permit" and
"public waters" shall have the

26 meanings attributed to these terms in chapters 90.03 and
90.44

27 RCW.

28 (6) "Public water entity" means any public
or governmental

29 entity with authority to administer and operate a system
to supply

30 water for irrigation of agricultural lands.

31 (7) "Transfer" means a transfer,
change, or amendment to a

32 water right referred to in RCW 90.03.380, 90.03.390,
or 90.44.100.

33 (8) "Withdraw" means to withdraw ground
water or to divert

34 surface water.

35 Sec. 13. RCW
90.66.060 and 1979 c 3 s 6 are each amended to read as

36 follows:

37 (1) Except as provided in subsections (2) and (3)
of this

HB 1877 p. 10

_1 section, the right to withdraw water for use for
the irrigation of

_2 agricultural lands under authority of a family farm
permit shall

_3 have no time limit ((but)) and shall be
conditioned upon the land

_4 being irrigated complying with the definition of a
family farm as

_5 defined at the time the permit is issued((:
PROVIDED, HOWEVER,

_6 That)).

_7 (2) If the acquisition by any person of land
and water rights

_8 by gift, devise, bequest, or by way of bona fide
satisfaction of a

_9 debt, would otherwise cause land being irrigated
pursuant to a

10 family farm permit to lose its status as a family farm,
such

11 acquisition shall be deemed to have no effect upon the
status of

12 family farm water permits pertaining to land held or
acquired by

13 the person acquiring such land and water rights if all
lands held

14 or acquired are again in compliance with the definition
of a

15 family farm within five years from the date of such
acquisition.

16 (((2))) If the department determines that
water is being

17 withdrawn under a family farm permit for use on land not
in

18 conformity with the definition of a family farm, the
department

19 shall notify the holder of such family farm permit by
personal

20 service of such fact and the permit shall be suspended
two years

21 from the date of receipt of notice unless the person
having a

22 controlling interest in said land satisfies the
department that

23 such land is again in conformity with the definition of
a family

24 farm. The department may, upon a showing of good cause
and

25 reasonable effort to attain compliance on the part of
the person

26 having the controlling interest in such land, extend the
two year

27 period prior to suspension. If conformity is not
achieved prior to

28 five years from the date of notice the rights of
withdrawal shall

29 be canceled.

30 (3) This section does not apply in any manner
whatsoever to a

31 transfer of surplus water authorized by section 11(3)
of this act;

32 however, this section does apply to other transfers
of a water

33 right established under the authority of a family
farm permit to

34 the extent that the transfer is to a use of water for
agricultural

35 irrigation purposes.

36 NEW SECTION. Sec. 14. Sections 1 through 3
of this act are

p. 11 HB
1877

_1 necessary for the immediate preservation of the public
peace,

_2 health, or safety, or support of the state government
and its

_3 existing public institutions, and take effect
immediately.

‑‑‑ END ‑‑‑

HB 1877 p. 12