BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF
WASHINGTON:

_5 NEW SECTION. Sec. 1. A new section is
added to chapter 90.66

_6 RCW to read as follows:

_7 (1) Transfers of water rights established under the
authority

_8 of family farm permits may be approved as authorized
under this

_9 section and under RCW 90.03.380, 90.03.390, or 90.44.100
as

10 appropriate.

11 (2) A water right established under the authority of
a family

12 farm permit may be transferred:

13 (a) For use for agricultural irrigation purposes as
limited by

14 RCW 90.66.060 (1) and (2) except as provided in RCW
90.66.060(3);

15 (b) To any purpose of use that is a beneficial use
of water if

16 the transfer is made exclusively under a lease
agreement, except

17 that transfers for the use of water for agricultural
irrigation

p. 1 HB
1878

_1 purposes shall be limited as provided by RCW 90.66.060
(1) and

_2 (2);

_3 (c) To any purpose of use that is a beneficial use
of water if

_4 the water right is for the use of water at a location
that is,

_5 immediately before the transfer is approved, within the
boundaries

_6 of a city or town or within the boundaries of an urban
growth area

_7 designated under chapter 36.70A RCW, except that
transfers for the

_8 use of water for agricultural irrigation purposes shall
be limited

_9 as provided by RCW 90.66.060 (1) and (2).

10 (3) If a portion of the water governed by a water
right

11 established under the authority of a family farm permit
is made

12 surplus to the beneficial uses exercised under the right
through

13 the implementation of practices or technologies,
including but not

14 limited to conveyance practices or technologies, which
are more

15 efficient or more water-use efficient than those under
which the

16 right was perfected, the right to use the surplus water
may be

17 transferred to any purpose of use that is a beneficial
use of

18 water. Nothing in this subsection authorizes: A
transfer of the

19 portion of a water right that is necessary for the
production of

20 crops historically grown under the right; or a transfer
of a water

21 right or a portion of a water right that has not been
perfected

22 through beneficial use before the transfer.

23 (4) The authority granted by this section to
transfer or alter

24 the purpose of use of a water right established under
the

25 authority of a family farm permit shall not be construed
as

26 limiting in any manner the authority granted by RCW
90.03.380,

27 90.03.390, or 90.44.100 to alter other elements of such
a water

28 right.

29 Sec. 2. RCW 90.66.040
and 1979 c 3 s 4 are each amended to read as

30 follows:

31 For the purposes of this chapter, the following
definitions

32 shall be applicable:

33 (1) "Family farm" means a geographic area
including not more

34 than two thousand acres of irrigated agricultural lands,
whether

35 contiguous or noncontiguous, the controlling interest in
which is

36 held by a person having a controlling interest in no
more than two

HB 1878 p. 2

_1 thousand acres of irrigated agricultural lands in the
state of

_2 Washington which are irrigated under rights acquired
after

_3 December 8, 1977.

_4 (2) "Person" means any individual,
corporation, partnership,

_5 limited partnership, organization, or other entity
whatsoever,

_6 whether public or private. The term "person"
shall include as one

_7 person all corporate or partnership entities with a
common

_8 ownership of more than one-half of the assets of each of
any

_9 number of such entities.

10 (3) "Controlling interest" means a
property interest that can

11 be transferred to another person, the percentage
interest so

12 transferred being sufficient to effect a change in
control of the

13 landlord's rights and benefits. Ownership of property
held in trust

14 shall not be deemed a controlling interest where no part
of the

15 trust has been established through expenditure or
assignment of

16 assets of the beneficiary of the trust and where the
rights of the

17 family farm permit which is a part of the trust cannot
be

18 transferred to another by the beneficiary of the trust
under terms

19 of the trust. Each trust of a separate donor origin
shall be

20 treated as a separate entity and the administration of
property

21 under trust shall not represent a controlling interest
on the part

22 of the trust officer.

23 (4) "Department" means the department of
ecology of the state

24 of Washington.

25 (5) "Application", "permit" and
"public waters" shall have the

26 meanings attributed to these terms in chapters 90.03 and
90.44

27 RCW.

28 (6) "Public water entity" means any public
or governmental

29 entity with authority to administer and operate a system
to supply

30 water for irrigation of agricultural lands.

31 (7) "Transfer" means a transfer,
change, or amendment to a

32 water right referred to in RCW 90.03.380, 90.03.390,
or 90.44.100.

33 (8) "Withdraw" means to withdraw ground
water or to divert

34 surface water.

35 Sec. 3. RCW
90.66.060 and 1979 c 3 s 6 are each amended to read as

36 follows:

37 (1) Except as provided in subsections (2) and (3)
of this

p. 3 HB
1878

_1 section, the right to withdraw water for use for
the irrigation of

_2 agricultural lands under authority of a family farm
permit shall

_3 have no time limit ((but)) and shall be
conditioned upon the land

_4 being irrigated complying with the definition of a
family farm as

_5 defined at the time the permit is issued((:
PROVIDED, HOWEVER,

_6 That)).

_7 (2) If the acquisition by any person of land
and water rights

_8 by gift, devise, bequest, or by way of bona fide
satisfaction of a

_9 debt, would otherwise cause land being irrigated
pursuant to a

10 family farm permit to lose its status as a family farm,
such

11 acquisition shall be deemed to have no effect upon the
status of

12 family farm water permits pertaining to land held or
acquired by

13 the person acquiring such land and water rights if all
lands held

14 or acquired are again in compliance with the definition
of a

15 family farm within five years from the date of such
acquisition.

16 (((2))) If the department determines that
water is being

17 withdrawn under a family farm permit for use on land not
in

18 conformity with the definition of a family farm, the
department

19 shall notify the holder of such family farm permit by
personal

20 service of such fact and the permit shall be suspended
two years

21 from the date of receipt of notice unless the person
having a

22 controlling interest in said land satisfies the
department that

23 such land is again in conformity with the definition of
a family

24 farm. The department may, upon a showing of good cause
and

25 reasonable effort to attain compliance on the part of
the person

26 having the controlling interest in such land, extend the
two year

27 period prior to suspension. If conformity is not
achieved prior to

28 five years from the date of notice the rights of
withdrawal shall

29 be canceled.

30 (3) This section does not apply in any manner
whatsoever to a

31 transfer of surplus water authorized by section 1(3)
of this act;

32 however, this section does apply to other transfers
of a water

33 right established under the authority of a family
farm permit to

34 the extent that the transfer is to a use of water for
agricultural

35 irrigation purposes.

36 Sec. 4. RCW
90.03.380 and 1997 c 442 s 801 are each amended to

37 read as follows:

HB 1878 p. 4

_1 (1) The right to the use of water which has been
applied to a

_2 beneficial use in the state shall be and remain
appurtenant to the

_3 land or place upon which the same is used: PROVIDED,
HOWEVER,

_4 That the right may be transferred to another or to
others and

_5 become appurtenant to any other land or place of use
without loss

_6 of priority of right theretofore established if such
change can be

_7 made without detriment or injury to existing rights.
The point of

_8 diversion of water for beneficial use or the purpose of
use may be

_9 changed, if such change can be made without detriment or
injury to

10 existing rights.

11 (a) A change in the place of use, point of
diversion, and/or

12 purpose of use of a water right to enable irrigation of
additional

13 acreage or the addition of new uses may be permitted if
such

14 change results in no increase in the annual consumptive
quantity

15 of water used under the water right. For purposes of
this section,

16 "annual consumptive quantity" means the
estimated or actual annual

17 amount of water diverted pursuant to the water right,
reduced by

18 the estimated annual amount of return flows, averaged
over the

19 most recent five-year period of continuous beneficial
use of the

20 water right.

21 (b) Before any transfer of such right to use
water or change of

22 the point of diversion of water or change of purpose of
use can be

23 made, any person having an interest in the transfer or
change,

24 shall file a written application therefor with the
department, and

25 the application shall not be granted until notice of the

26 application is published as provided in RCW 90.03.280.
If it shall

27 appear that such transfer or such change may be made
without

28 injury or detriment to existing rights, the department
shall issue

29 to the applicant a certificate in duplicate granting the
right for

30 such transfer or for such change of point of diversion
or of use.

31 The certificate so issued shall be filed and be made a
record with

32 the department and the duplicate certificate issued to
the

33 applicant may be filed with the county auditor in like
manner and

34 with the same effect as provided in the original
certificate or

35 permit to divert water.

36 (2) If an application for change proposes to
transfer water

37 rights from one irrigation district to another, the
department

38 shall, before publication of notice, receive concurrence
from each

p. 5 HB
1878

_1 of the irrigation districts that such transfer or change
will not

_2 adversely affect the ability to deliver water to other
landowners

_3 or impair the financial integrity of either of the
districts.

_4 (3) A change in place of use by an individual water user
or

_5 users of water provided by an irrigation district need
only

_6 receive approval for the change from the board of
directors of the

_7 district if the use of water continues within the
irrigation

_8 district, and when water is provided by an irrigation
entity that

_9 is a member of a board of joint control created under
chapter

10 87.80 RCW, approval need only be received from the board
of joint

11 control if the use of water continues within the area of

12 jurisdiction of the joint board and the change can be
made without

13 detriment or injury to existing rights.

14 (4) This section shall not apply to trust water
rights acquired

15 by the state through the funding of water conservation
projects

16 under chapter 90.38 RCW or RCW 90.42.010 through 90.42.070.

17 Subsection (1)(a) of this section does not apply to
and shall not

18 be construed as providing any limitation to the
transfers,

19 changes, or amendments of water rights established
under the

20 authority of a family farm permit that are authorized
under

21 section 1 of this act.

‑‑‑ END ‑‑‑

HB 1878 p. 6