BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF
WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec.
1. A new section is added
to chapter 90.03 RCW to read as follows:

It is in the public
interest for municipal water suppliers to be able to use water resources to
meet the current and future water supply needs of the public generally and to
achieve the objectives of the state's growth management act, chapter 36.70A
RCW, where applicable. A growing communities doctrine, that acknowledges the
distinctive role of municipal water suppliers to maintain sufficient water to
support future growth within the state, has been implicitly recognized in our
statutes and is hereby explicitly adopted. Accordingly, the legislature
declares that water rights shall be interpreted and administered in recognition
of the distinctive role and legal duties that municipal water suppliers have to
serve growing communities, specifically including but not limited to the
following: Municipal water suppliers may acquire and retain water rights for
reasonably anticipated future needs; water rights held by municipal water
suppliers shall have a place of use consistent with applicable growth
management and water system planning statutes; and reasonable diligence for
fully developing new and existing water rights held by municipal water
suppliers shall be interpreted consistent with the needs of growing communities
for reasonable assurance of continued future water supply. It is further the
intent of the legislature that municipal water suppliers shall comply with
applicable environmental laws and rules, including those that provide for
protection of fish habitat, and applicable state water conservation
requirements.

Sec. 2. RCW 90.03.015 and 1987 c
109 s 65 are each amended to read as follows:

As used in this
chapter and chapters 90.14 and 90.44 RCW:

(1)
"Department" means the department of ecology;

(2)
"Director" means the director of ecology; ((and))

(3) "Municipal
water supplier" means a purveyor, as defined in RCW 70.116.030(4), that is
either: (a) A municipal corporation; or (b) an entity that (i) owns or
operates a public water system that is entitled or obligated to serve existing
and additional customers and uses within one or more approved water service
areas to the extent such customers and uses are allowed under an applicable
land use plan, and (ii) has an approved water system plan pursuant to chapter
43.20 RCW that includes supplies of water for domestic use, commercial use, and
use by publicly owned institutions or structures;

(4) "Municipal
water supply purposes" means any use for which water is or is anticipated
to be provided by a municipal water supplier; and

(5)
"Person" means any firm, association, water users' association,
corporation, irrigation district, or municipal corporation, as well as an
individual.

Sec. 3. RCW 90.03.330 and 1987 c
109 s 89 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) Upon a
showing satisfactory to the department that any appropriation has been
perfected in accordance with the provisions of this chapter, it shall be the
duty of the department to issue to the applicant a certificate stating such
facts in a form to be prescribed by ((him)) the director, and
such certificate shall thereupon be recorded with the department. Any original
water right certificate issued, as provided by this chapter, shall be recorded
with the department and thereafter, at the expense of the party receiving the
same, be by the department transmitted to the county auditor of the county or
counties where the distributing system or any part thereof is located, and be
recorded in the office of such county auditor, and thereafter be transmitted to
the owner thereof.

(2) Any water right
certificate issued before the effective date of this act and held by a
municipal water supplier shall be considered a water right in good standing
where: (a) The water has been applied to beneficial use; or (b) the water is
to be used for reasonably anticipated future needs.

(3) Except as set
forth in RCW 90.03.240, the department shall not rescind or reissue any water
right certificate without the consent of the water right holder. Nothing in
this section shall prohibit the department from correcting ministerial errors
in a water right certificate; nor shall this section be construed to prohibit
the department from issuing a certificate pursuant to RCW 90.03.380 or an
amendment pursuant to RCW 90.44.100, when the certificate holder applies to the
department for a transfer or change pursuant to RCW 90.03.380 or for an
amendment pursuant to RCW 90.44.100.

Sec. 4. RCW 90.03.460 and 1917 c
117 s 43 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) Nothing in
this chapter contained shall operate to effect an impairment of any inchoate
right to divert and use water while the application of the water in question to
a beneficial use is being prosecuted with reasonable diligence, having due
regard to the circumstances surrounding the enterprise, including the magnitude
of the project for putting the water to a beneficial use and the market for the
resulting water right for irrigation or power or other beneficial use, in the
locality in question.

(2) A municipal
water supplier prosecutes its water right with reasonable diligence when the
right has been or is identified to meet existing or reasonably anticipated
future needs in an approved water system plan pursuant to chapter 43.20 RCW or
an approved coordinated water system plan pursuant to chapter 70.116 RCW. This
subsection shall not be interpreted to limit or exclude other methods or means
of prosecuting a water right with reasonable diligence, including, without
limitation, installed system capacity.

(3) Municipal water
suppliers shall have a minimum of fifty years from the latest approval of a
plan identified in subsection (2) of this section to put to use their water
rights identified for reasonably anticipated future use. Municipal water
suppliers may have additional time based on the particular facts and
circumstances, including, without limitation, the size and nature of the water
diversion or conveyance project, projected useful life of facilities, size and
nature of service areas, growth projections, system interconnections, water
conservation, and financing requirements.

Sec. 5. RCW 90.03.386 and 1991 c
350 s 2 are each amended to read as follows:

Within service areas
established pursuant to chapters 43.20 and 70.116 RCW, the department of
ecology and the department of health shall coordinate approval procedures to
ensure compliance and consistency with the approved water system plan. For
water appropriations held by a municipal water supplier, the place of use shall
be the water service areas in the municipal water supplier's water system plan
approved pursuant to chapter 43.20 RCW or coordinated water system plan
approved pursuant to chapter 70.116 RCW, as either plan may be amended from
time to time.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
6. A new section is added
to chapter 90.03 RCW to read as follows:

The beneficial use of
water governed by an inchoate water right or inchoate portion of a water right
described in RCW 90.03.330 that begins on or after the effective date of this
section is subject to the following conditions:

(1) The beneficial use
shall be consistent with any watershed plan adopted under chapter 90.82 RCW
that is applicable to the watershed in which the water is diverted or withdrawn
and the watershed in which the water is used, and is consistent with any
requirements for mitigating the effects of water diversions and withdrawals in
the watershed that are identified in the plan. Further, the municipal water
supplier holding the water right shall participate in any watershed planning
conducted under chapter 90.82 RCW for the watershed.

(2) The water system
plan approved by the department of health for the public water system shall
satisfy the requirements that apply to the plan under section 7(1) (b) and (c)
of this act and the water withdrawal target rate applicable to the plan shall
be achieved by the public water system by the end of the six-year life of the
plan. Achieving a more water use efficient withdrawal rate is desirable but
not required. This subsection (2) applies to a public water system with one
thousand or more service connections.

(3) For a use of water
from or in a watershed in which one or more aquatic species have been listed as
threatened or endangered under the federal endangered species act, 16 U.S.C.
Sec. 1531 et seq., the beneficial use shall be consistent with requirements
imposed by the federal government under the act on such a use in the watershed.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
7. A new section is added
to chapter 43.20 RCW to read as follows:

(1)(a) Each year, the
department of health shall determine the volume of water annually withdrawn by
each public water system with one thousand or more service connections and
shall determine the annual average amount of water withdrawn per service
connection in the system. The secretary of health may adjust the average as
described in subsection (2) of this section. The department shall group the
systems by geographic areas with similar climatological characteristics and,
using these averages and adjusted averages as appropriate, shall determine the
annual average amount of water withdrawn per service connection in each such
group. This average for the public water systems in each geographic group
constitutes the water withdrawal target rate for the group. The department
shall publish these target rates annually.

(b) Each water system
plan of a public water system with one thousand or more connections submitted
to the department of health for approval shall be for a six-year planning
period. Beginning January 1, 2004, an inchoate portion of such a public water
system's water right shall not be developed or transferred, changed, or amended
for development unless the development or transfer, change, or amendment for
development is described in a water system plan approved by the department of
health for the system, the plan satisfies the requirements of (c) of this
subsection, and the development or transfer, change, or amendment takes place
during the six-year life of the water system plan.

(c) If the water
system plan for a public water system with one thousand or more service
connections includes a description of the development of an inchoate portion of
the system's water right or the transfer, change, or amendment of an inchoate
portion of the right for development, the plan shall contain provisions
identifying how the annual average amount of water withdrawn per service
connection by the system, as adjusted under subsection (2) of this section,
will meet a water withdrawal target rate published under (b) of this subsection
for the system's geographic group for either of the two calendar years
preceding the system's submission of the plan to the department of health for
approval. The department of health shall not approve a plan containing such a
description of the development of an inchoate water right or the transfer,
change, or amendment for development of an inchoate water right unless the plan
identifies how the system will meet the water withdrawal target rate during the
six-year life of the plan.

(2) If the secretary
of health determines that the use of water provided by a public water system is
dominated by one or more very large commercial or industrial users such that
the annual average of the amount of water withdrawn per service connection by
the system calculated by the department under subsection (1)(a) of this section
is quite different than it would be, considering water use rates by each
category of use, if the commercial or industrial water use were not so
disproportionate to other uses, the secretary may adjust the annual average
calculated for the water system to compensate for the disproportionate use.
The secretary shall adopt rules identifying the circumstances under which such
adjustments may be made and how they may be made.

(3) The department of
health shall provide enhanced technical assistance to public water systems that
are developing water system plans to meet water withdrawal target rates. The
objective of the enhanced support is to assist the systems in identifying and
evaluating tools and techniques that might be used to meet the target rates.

(4) For the purposes
of this section, a public water system that achieves a water withdrawal rate
under which the annual average of the amount of water withdrawn per service
connection by the system is equal to or less than the water withdrawal target
rate applicable to the system's water system plan has achieved the water
withdrawal target rate applicable to the plan. Similarly, a plan for achieving
an annual average of the amount of water withdrawn per service connection that
is equal to or less than the water withdrawal target rate applicable to the
plan is a plan for achieving the water withdrawal target rate applicable to the
plan.

(5) For the purposes
of subsections (1) and (2) of this section, a water "withdrawal"
means both a water diversion and a water withdrawal and water
"withdrawn" refers to both water diverted and water withdrawn.

Sec. 8. RCW 90.03.383 and 1991 c
350 s 1 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) The legislature
recognizes the value of interties for improving the reliability of public water
systems, enhancing their management, and more efficiently utilizing the
increasingly limited resource. Given the continued growth in the most populous
areas of the state, the increased complexity of public water supply management,
and the trend toward regional planning and regional solutions to resource
issues, interconnections of public water systems through interties provide a
valuable tool to ensure reliable public water supplies for the citizens of the
state. Public water systems have been encouraged in the past to utilize
interties to achieve public health and resource management objectives. The
legislature finds that it is in the public interest to recognize interties
existing and in use as of January 1, 1991, and to have associated water rights
modified by the department of ecology to reflect current use of water through
those interties, pursuant to subsection (3) of this section. The legislature
further finds it in the public interest to develop a coordinated process to
review proposals for interties commencing use after January 1, 1991.

(2) For the purposes
of this section, the following definitions shall apply:

(a)
"Interties" are interconnections between public water systems
permitting exchange, acquisition, or delivery of water between those
systems for other than emergency supply purposes, where such exchange or
delivery is within established instantaneous and annual withdrawal rates
specified in the systems' existing water right permits or certificates, or
contained in claims filed pursuant to chapter 90.14 RCW, and which results in
better management of public water supply consistent with existing rights and
obligations. Interties include interconnections between public water systems
permitting exchange, acquisition, or delivery of water to serve as
primary or secondary sources of supply((, but do not include development of
new sources of supply to meet future demand)).

(b) "Service
area" is the area designated in a water system plan or a coordinated water
system plan pursuant to chapter 43.20 or 70.116 RCW respectively. When a
public water system does not have a designated service area subject to the
approval process of those chapters, the service area shall be the designated
place of use contained in the water right permit or certificate, or contained
in the claim filed pursuant to chapter 90.14 RCW.

(3) Public water systems
with interties existing and in use as of January 1, 1991, or that have received
written approval from the department of health prior to that date, shall file
written notice of those interties with the department of health and the
department of ecology. The notice may be incorporated into the public water
system's five-year update of its water system plan, but shall be filed no later
than June 30, 1996. The notice shall identify the location of the intertie;
the dates of its first use; the purpose, capacity, and current use; the
intertie agreement of the parties and the service areas assigned; and other
information reasonably necessary to modify the water right permit.
Notwithstanding the provisions of RCW 90.03.380 and 90.44.100, for public water
systems with interties existing and in use as of January 1, 1991, the
department of ecology, upon receipt of notice meeting the requirements of this
subsection, shall, as soon as practicable, modify the place of use descriptions
in the water right permits, certificates, or claims to reflect the actual use
through such interties, provided that the place of use is within service area
designations established in a water system plan approved pursuant to chapter
43.20 RCW, or a coordinated water system plan approved pursuant to chapter
70.116 RCW, and further provided that the water used is within the
instantaneous and annual withdrawal rates specified in the water right permit
and that no outstanding complaints of impairment to existing water rights have
been filed with the department of ecology prior to September 1, 1991. Where
such complaints of impairment have been received, the department of ecology
shall make all reasonable efforts to resolve them in a timely manner through
agreement of the parties or through available administrative remedies.

(4) Notwithstanding
the provisions of RCW 90.03.380 and 90.44.100, exchange or delivery of water
through interties commencing use after January 1, 1991, shall be permitted when
the intertie improves overall system reliability, enhances the manageability of
the systems, provides opportunities for conjunctive use, or delays or avoids
the need to develop new water sources, and otherwise meets the requirements of
this section, provided that each public water system's water use shall not
exceed the instantaneous or annual withdrawal rate specified in its water right
authorization, shall not adversely affect existing water rights, and shall not
be inconsistent with state-approved plans such as water system plans or other
plans which include specific proposals for construction of interties.
Interties commencing use after January 1, 1991, shall not be inconsistent with
regional water resource plans developed pursuant to chapter 90.54 RCW.

(5) For public water
systems subject to the approval process of chapter 43.20 RCW or chapter 70.116
RCW, proposals for interties commencing use after January 1, 1991, shall be
incorporated into water system plans pursuant to chapter 43.20 RCW or
coordinated water system plans pursuant to chapter 70.116 RCW and submitted to
the department of health and the department of ecology for review and approval
as provided for in subsections (5) through (9) of this section. The plan shall
state how the proposed intertie will improve overall system reliability,
enhance the manageability of the systems, provide opportunities for conjunctive
use, or delay or avoid the need to develop new water sources.

(6) The department of
health shall be responsible for review and approval of proposals for new
interties. In its review the department of health shall determine whether the
intertie satisfies the criteria of subsection (4) of this section, with the
exception of water rights considerations, which are the responsibility of the
department of ecology, and shall determine whether the intertie is necessary to
address emergent public health or safety concerns associated with public water
supply.

(7) If the intertie is
determined by the department of health to be necessary to address emergent
public health or safety concerns associated with public water supply, the
public water system shall amend its water system plan as required and shall
file an application with the department of ecology to change its existing water
right to reflect the proposed use of the water as described in the approved
water system plan. The department of ecology shall process the application for
change pursuant to RCW 90.03.380 or 90.44.100 as appropriate, except that,
notwithstanding the requirements of those sections regarding notice and protest
periods, applicants shall be required to publish notice one time, and the
comment period shall be fifteen days from the date of publication of the
notice. Within sixty days of receiving the application, the department of
ecology shall issue findings and advise the department of health if existing
water rights are determined to be adversely affected. If no determination is
provided by the department of ecology within the sixty-day period, the
department of health shall proceed as if existing rights are not adversely
affected by the proposed intertie. The department of ecology may obtain an
extension of the sixty-day period by submitting written notice to the
department of health and to the applicant indicating a definite date by which
its determination will be made. No additional extensions shall be granted, and
in no event shall the total review period for the department of ecology exceed
one hundred eighty days.

(8) If the department
of health determines the proposed intertie appears to meet the requirements of
subsection (4) of this section but is not necessary to address emergent public
health or safety concerns associated with public water supply, the department
of health shall instruct the applicant to submit to the department of ecology
an application for change to the underlying water right or claim as necessary
to reflect the new place of use. The department of ecology shall consider the applications
pursuant to the provisions of RCW 90.03.380 and 90.44.100 as appropriate. If
in its review of proposed interties and associated water rights the department
of ecology determines that additional information is required to act on the
application, the department may request applicants to provide information
necessary for its decision, consistent with agency rules and written
guidelines. Parties disagreeing with the decision of the department of ecology
on the application for change in place of use may appeal the decision to the
pollution control hearings board.

(9) The department of
health may approve plans containing intertie proposals prior to the department
of ecology's decision on the water right application for change in place of
use. However, notwithstanding such approval, construction work on the intertie
shall not begin until the department of ecology issues the appropriate water
right document to the applicant consistent with the approved plan.

(10)
An intertie may not be used to deliver a primary or secondary supply of water
to a receiving system on a temporary basis unless the terms of the intertie
agreement specify the source of the water that will be used by the receiving
system to replace the water delivered on the temporary basis, and provide that
replacement water will be available for delivery to, or use by, the receiving
system before delivery by the supplying system under the agreement is
terminated. However, if a primary or secondary supply of water is delivered to
a receiving system on a temporary basis by means of an intertie on the
effective date of this section and the agreement between the supplying system
and receiving system does not contain such provision for such a replacement
supply of water for the receiving system, the delivery of the water by the
supplying system to the receiving system may not be terminated until the
agreement is modified to establish such provisions, and such replacement water
is available for delivery to or use by the receiving system.

---
END ---