BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF
WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1. RCW 36.28A.010 and 1975
1st ex.s. c 172 s 1 are each amended to read as follows:

The Washington
association of ((sheriffs)) constables and police chiefs is
hereby declared to be a combination of units of local government: PROVIDED,
That such association shall not be considered an "employer" within
the meaning of RCW 41.26.030(2) or 41.40.010(4): PROVIDED FURTHER, That no
compensation received as an employee of the association shall be considered
salary for purposes of the provisions of any retirement system created pursuant
to the general laws of this state: PROVIDED FURTHER, That such association
shall not qualify for inclusion under the unallocated two mills of the property
tax of any political subdivision: PROVIDED FURTHER, That the association shall
not have the authority to assess any excess levy or bond measure.

Sec. 2. RCW 36.28A.020 and 1991
c 363 s 56 are each amended to read as follows:

The Washington
association of ((sheriffs)) constables and police chiefs may,
upon request of a county's legislative authority, assist the county in
developing and implementing its local law and justice plan. In doing so, the
association shall consult with the office of financial management and the
department of corrections.

Sec. 3. RCW 36.28A.030 and 1993
c 127 s 4 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) The Washington
association of ((sheriffs)) constables and police chiefs shall
establish and maintain a central repository for the collection and
classification of information regarding violations of RCW 9A.36.080. Upon
establishing such a repository, the association shall develop a procedure to
monitor, record, and classify information relating to violations of RCW
9A.36.080 and any other crimes of bigotry or bias apparently directed against
other persons because the people committing the crimes perceived that their
victims were of a particular race, color, religion, ancestry, national origin,
gender, sexual orientation, or had a mental, physical, or sensory handicap.

(2) All local law
enforcement agencies shall report monthly to the association concerning all violations
of RCW 9A.36.080 and any other crimes of bigotry or bias in such form and in
such manner as prescribed by rules adopted by the association. Agency
participation in the association's reporting programs, with regard to the
specific data requirements associated with violations of RCW 9A.36.080 and any
other crimes of bigotry or bias, shall be deemed to meet agency reporting
requirements. The association must summarize the information received and file
an annual report with the governor and the senate law and justice committee and
the house of representatives judiciary committee.

(3) The
association shall disseminate the information according to the provisions of
chapters 10.97 and 10.98 RCW, and all other confidentiality requirements
imposed by federal or Washington law.

Sec. 4. RCW 36.28A.040 and 2000
c 3 s 1 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) No later than
December 31, 2001, the Washington association of ((sheriffs)) constables
and police chiefs shall implement and operate an electronic statewide city and
county jail booking and reporting system. The system shall serve as a central
repository and instant information source for offender information and jail
statistical data. The system shall be placed on the Washington state justice
information network and be capable of communicating electronically with every
Washington state city and county jail and with all other Washington state
criminal justice agencies as defined in RCW 10.97.030.

(2) After the
Washington association of ((sheriffs)) constables and police
chiefs has implemented an electronic jail booking system as described in
subsection (1) of this section, if a city or county jail or law enforcement
agency receives state or federal funding to cover the entire cost of
implementing or reconfiguring an electronic jail booking system, the city or
county jail or law enforcement agency shall implement or reconfigure an
electronic jail booking system that is in compliance with the jail booking
system standards developed pursuant to subsection (4) of this section.

(3) After the
Washington association of ((sheriffs)) constables and police
chiefs has implemented an electronic jail booking system as described in
subsection (1) of this section, city or county jails, or law enforcement
agencies that operate electronic jail booking systems, but choose not to accept
state or federal money to implement or reconfigure electronic jail booking
systems, shall electronically forward jail booking information to the
Washington association of ((sheriffs)) constables and police
chiefs. At a minimum the information forwarded shall include the name of the
offender, vital statistics, the date the offender was arrested, the offenses
arrested for, and if available, the mug shot. The electronic format in which
the information is sent shall be at the discretion of the city or county jail,
or law enforcement agency forwarding the information. City and county jails or
law enforcement agencies that forward jail booking information under this
subsection are not required to comply with the standards developed under
subsection (4)(b) of this section.

(4) The Washington
association of ((sheriffs)) constables and police chiefs shall
appoint, convene, and manage a statewide jail booking and reporting system
standards committee. The committee shall include representatives from the
Washington association of ((sheriffs)) constables and police
chiefs correction committee, the information service board's justice
information committee, the judicial information system, at least two
individuals who serve as jailers in a city or county jail, and other
individuals that the Washington association of ((sheriffs)) constables
and police chiefs places on the committee. The committee shall have the
authority to:

(a) Develop and amend
as needed standards for the statewide jail booking and reporting system and for
the information that must be contained within the system. At a minimum, the
system shall contain:

(i) The offenses the
individual has been charged with;

(ii) Descriptive and
personal information about each offender booked into a city or county jail. At
a minimum, this information shall contain the offender's name, vital
statistics, address, and mugshot;

(iii) Information about
the offender while in jail, which could be used to protect criminal justice
officials that have future contact with the offender, such as medical
conditions, acts of violence, and other behavior problems;

(iv) Statistical data
indicating the current capacity of each jail and the quantity and category of
offenses charged; and

(v) The ability to
communicate directly and immediately with the city and county jails and other
criminal justice entities;

(b) Develop and amend
as needed operational standards for city and county jail booking systems, which
at a minimum shall include the type of information collected and transmitted,
and the technical requirements needed for the city and county jail booking
system to communicate with the statewide jail booking and reporting system;

(c) Develop and amend
as needed standards for allocating grants to city and county jails or law
enforcement agencies that will be implementing or reconfiguring electronic jail
booking systems.

(5) By January 1, 2001,
the standards committee shall complete the initial standards described in
subsection (4) of this section, and the standards shall be placed into a report
and provided to all Washington state city and county jails, all other criminal
justice agencies as defined in RCW 10.97.030, the chair of the Washington state
senate human services and corrections committee, and the chair of the
Washington state house of representatives criminal justice and corrections
committee.

Sec. 5. RCW 36.28A.050 and 2000 c
3 s 2 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) The Washington
association of ((sheriffs)) constables and police chiefs shall
establish and manage a local jail booking system grant fund. All federal or
state money collected to offset the costs associated with RCW 36.28A.040(2)
shall be processed through the grant fund established by this section. The
statewide jail booking and reporting system standards committee established
under RCW 36.28A.040(4) shall distribute the grants in accordance with any standards
it develops.

(2) The Washington
association of ((sheriffs)) constables and police chiefs shall
pursue federal funding to be placed into the local jail booking system grant
fund.

Sec. 6. RCW 4.24.5501 and 1997 c
364 s 6 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) By December 1,
1997, the Washington association of ((sheriffs)) constables and
police chiefs shall develop a model policy for law enforcement agencies to
follow when they disclose information about sex offenders to the public under
RCW 4.24.550. The model policy shall be designed to further the objectives of
providing adequate notice to the community concerning sex offenders who are or
will be residing in the community and of assisting community members in
developing constructive plans to prepare themselves and their children for
residing near released sex offenders.

(2) In developing the
policy, the association shall consult with representatives of the following
agencies and professions: (a) The department of corrections; (b) the
department of social and health services; (c) the indeterminate sentence review
board; (d) the Washington state council of police officers; (e) local
correctional agencies; (f) the Washington association of prosecuting attorneys;
(g) the Washington public defender association; (h) the Washington association
for the treatment of sexual abusers; and (i) victim advocates.

(3) The model policy
shall, at a minimum, include recommendations to address the following issues:
(a) Procedures for local agencies or officials to accomplish the notifications
required under RCW 4.24.550(8); (b) contents and form of community notification
documents, including procedures for ensuring the accuracy of factual
information contained in the notification documents, and ways of protecting the
privacy of victims of the offenders' crimes; (c) methods of distributing
community notification documents; (d) methods of providing follow-up
notifications to community residents at specified intervals and of disclosing
information about offenders to law enforcement agencies in other jurisdictions
if necessary to protect the public; (e) methods of educating community
residents at public meetings on how they can use the information in the
notification document in a reasonable manner to enhance their individual and
collective safety; (f) procedures for educating community members regarding the
right of sex offenders not to be the subject of harassment or criminal acts as
a result of the notification process; and (g) other matters the Washington
association of ((sheriffs)) constables and police chiefs deems
necessary to ensure the effective and fair administration of RCW 4.24.550.

Sec. 7. RCW 9.94A.060 and 1996 c
232 s 3 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) The commission
consists of twenty voting members, one of whom the governor shall designate as
chairperson. With the exception of ex officio voting members, the voting
members of the commission shall be appointed by the governor, subject to
confirmation by the senate.

(2) The voting
membership consists of the following:

(a) The head of the
state agency having general responsibility for adult correction programs, as an
ex officio member;

(b) The director of
financial management or designee, as an ex officio member;

(c) Until the
indeterminate sentence review board ceases to exist pursuant to RCW 9.95.0011,
the chair of the board, as an ex officio member;

(d) The head of the
state agency, or the agency head's designee, having responsibility for juvenile
corrections programs, as an ex officio member;

(e) Two prosecuting attorneys;

(f) Two attorneys with
particular expertise in defense work;

(g) Four persons who
are superior court judges;

(h) One person who is
the chief law enforcement officer of a county or city;

(i) Four members of the
public who are not prosecutors, defense attorneys, judges, or law enforcement
officers, one of whom is a victim of crime or a crime victims' advocate;

(j) One person who is
an elected official of a county government, other than a prosecuting attorney
or sheriff;

(k) One person who is an
elected official of a city government;

(l) One person who is
an administrator of juvenile court services.

In making the
appointments, the governor shall endeavor to assure that the commission
membership includes adequate representation and expertise relating to both the
adult criminal justice system and the juvenile justice system. In making the
appointments, the governor shall seek the recommendations of Washington
prosecutors in respect to the prosecuting attorney members, of the Washington
state bar association in respect to the defense attorney members, of the
association of superior court judges in respect to the members who are judges,
of the Washington association of ((sheriffs)) constables and
police chiefs in respect to the member who is a law enforcement officer, of the
Washington state association of counties in respect to the member who is a
county official, of the association of Washington cities in respect to the
member who is a city official, of the office of crime victims advocacy and other
organizations of crime victims in respect to the member who is a victim of
crime or a crime victims' advocate, and of the Washington association of
juvenile court administrators in respect to the member who is an administrator
of juvenile court services.

(3)(a) All voting
members of the commission, except ex officio voting members, shall serve terms
of three years and until their successors are appointed and confirmed.

(b) The governor shall
stagger the terms of the members appointed under subsection (2)(j), (k), and
(l) of this section by appointing one of them for a term of one year, one for a
term of two years, and one for a term of three years.

(4) The speaker of the
house of representatives and the president of the senate may each appoint two
nonvoting members to the commission, one from each of the two largest caucuses
in each house. The members so appointed shall serve two-year terms, or until
they cease to be members of the house from which they were appointed, whichever
occurs first.

(5) The members of the
commission shall be reimbursed for travel expenses as provided in RCW 43.03.050
and 43.03.060. Legislative members shall be reimbursed by their respective
houses as provided under RCW 44.04.120, as now existing or hereafter amended.
Members shall be compensated in accordance with RCW 43.03.250.

Sec. 8. RCW 9.94A.207 and 1999 c
196 s 9 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) The secretary may
issue warrants for the arrest of any offender who violates a condition of
community placement or community custody. The arrest warrants shall authorize
any law enforcement or peace officer or community corrections officer of this
state or any other state where such offender may be located, to arrest the
offender and place him or her in total confinement pending disposition of the
alleged violation. The department shall compensate the local jurisdiction at
the office of financial management's adjudicated rate, in accordance with RCW
70.48.440. A community corrections officer, if he or she has reasonable cause
to believe an offender in community placement or community custody has violated
a condition of community placement or community custody, may suspend the
person's community placement or community custody status and arrest or cause
the arrest and detention in total confinement of the offender, pending the
determination of the secretary as to whether the violation has occurred. The
community corrections officer shall report to the secretary all facts and
circumstances and the reasons for the action of suspending community placement
or community custody status. A violation of a condition of community placement
or community custody shall be deemed a violation of the sentence for purposes
of RCW 9.94A.195. The authority granted to community corrections officers
under this section shall be in addition to that set forth in RCW 9.94A.195.

(2) Inmates, as defined
in RCW 72.09.015, who have been transferred to community custody and who are
detained in a local correctional facility are the financial responsibility of
the department of corrections, except as provided in subsection (3) of this
section. The community custody inmate shall be removed from the local
correctional facility, except as provided in subsection (3) of this section,
not later than eight days, excluding weekends and holidays, following
admittance to the local correctional facility and notification that the inmate
is available for movement to a state correctional institution.

(3) The department may
negotiate with local correctional authorities for an additional period of
detention; however, sex offenders sanctioned for community custody violations
under RCW 9.94A.205(2) to a term of confinement shall remain in the local
correctional facility for the complete term of the sanction. For confinement
sanctions imposed under RCW 9.94A.205(2)(a), the local correctional facility
shall be financially responsible. For confinement sanctions imposed under RCW
9.94A.205(2)(b), the department of corrections shall be financially responsible
for that portion of the sanction served during the time in which the sex
offender is on community custody in lieu of earned release, and the local
correctional facility shall be financially responsible for that portion of the
sanction served by the sex offender after the time in which the sex offender is
on community custody in lieu of earned release. The department, in
consultation with the Washington association of ((sheriffs)) constables
and police chiefs and those counties in which the sheriff does not operate a
correctional facility, shall establish a methodology for determining the
department's local correctional facilities bed utilization rate, for each
county in calendar year 1998, for offenders being held for violations of
conditions of community custody, community placement, or community
supervision. For confinement sanctions imposed under RCW 9.94A.205(2) (c) or
(d), the local correctional facility shall continue to be financially
responsible to the extent of the calendar year 1998 bed utilization rate. If
the department's use of bed space in local correctional facilities of any
county for confinement sanctions imposed on offenders sentenced to a term of
community custody under RCW 9.94A.205(2) (c) or (d) exceeds the 1998 bed utilization
rate for the county, the department shall compensate the county for the excess
use at the per diem rate equal to the lowest rate charged by the county under
its contract with a municipal government during the year in which the use
occurs.

Sec. 9. RCW 10.99.030 and 1996 c
248 s 6 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) All training
relating to the handling of domestic violence complaints by law enforcement
officers shall stress enforcement of criminal laws in domestic situations,
availability of community resources, and protection of the victim. Law
enforcement agencies and community organizations with expertise in the issue of
domestic violence shall cooperate in all aspects of such training.

(2) The criminal justice
training commission shall implement by January 1, 1997, a course of instruction
for the training of law enforcement officers in Washington in the handling of
domestic violence complaints. The basic law enforcement curriculum of the
criminal justice training commission shall include at least twenty hours of
basic training instruction on the law enforcement response to domestic
violence. The course of instruction, the learning and performance objectives,
and the standards for the training shall be developed by the commission and
focus on enforcing the criminal laws, safety of the victim, and holding the
perpetrator accountable for the violence. The curriculum shall include
training on the extent and prevalence of domestic violence, the importance of criminal
justice intervention, techniques for responding to incidents that minimize the
likelihood of officer injury and that promote victim safety, investigation and
interviewing skills, evidence gathering and report writing, assistance to and
services for victims and children, verification and enforcement of court
orders, liability, and any additional provisions that are necessary to carry
out the intention of this subsection.

(3) The criminal
justice training commission shall develop and update annually an in-service
training program to familiarize law enforcement officers with the domestic
violence laws. The program shall include techniques for handling incidents of
domestic violence that minimize the likelihood of injury to the officer and
that promote the safety of all parties. The commission shall make the training
program available to all law enforcement agencies in the state.

(4) Development of the
training in subsections (2) and (3) of this section shall be conducted in
conjunction with agencies having a primary responsibility for serving victims
of domestic violence with emergency shelter and other services, and
representatives to the statewide organization providing training and education
to these organizations and to the general public.

(5) The primary duty of
peace officers, when responding to a domestic violence situation, is to enforce
the laws allegedly violated and to protect the complaining party.

(6)(a) When a peace
officer responds to a domestic violence call and has probable cause to believe
that a crime has been committed, the peace officer shall exercise arrest powers
with reference to the criteria in RCW 10.31.100. The officer shall notify the
victim of the victim's right to initiate a criminal proceeding in all cases
where the officer has not exercised arrest powers or decided to initiate
criminal proceedings by citation or otherwise. The parties in such cases shall
also be advised of the importance of preserving evidence.

(b) A peace officer
responding to a domestic violence call shall take a complete offense report
including the officer's disposition of the case.

(7) When a peace
officer responds to a domestic violence call, the officer shall advise victims
of all reasonable means to prevent further abuse, including advising each
person of the availability of a shelter or other services in the community, and
giving each person immediate notice of the legal rights and remedies
available. The notice shall include handing each person a copy of the
following statement:

"IF
YOU ARE THE VICTIM OF DOMESTIC VIOLENCE, you can ask the city or county
prosecuting attorney to file a criminal complaint. You also have the right to
file a petition in superior, district, or municipal court requesting an order
for protection from domestic abuse which could include any of the following:
(a) An order restraining your abuser from further acts of abuse; (b) an order
directing your abuser to leave your household; (c) an order preventing your
abuser from entering your residence, school, business, or place of employment;
(d) an order awarding you or the other parent custody of or visitation with
your minor child or children; and (e) an order restraining your abuser from
molesting or interfering with minor children in your custody. The forms you
need to obtain a protection order are available in any municipal, district, or
superior court.

Information
about shelters and alternatives to domestic violence is available from a
statewide twenty-four-hour toll-free hot line at (include appropriate phone
number). The battered women's shelter and other resources in your area are
. . . . . (include local information)"

(8) The peace officer
may offer, arrange, or facilitate transportation for the victim to a hospital
for treatment of injuries or to a place of safety or shelter.

(9) The law enforcement
agency shall forward the offense report to the appropriate prosecutor within
ten days of making such report if there is probable cause to believe that an
offense has been committed, unless the case is under active investigation.

(10) Each law
enforcement agency shall make as soon as practicable a written record and shall
maintain records of all incidents of domestic violence reported to it.

(11) Records kept
pursuant to subsections (6) and (10) of this section shall be made identifiable
by means of a departmental code for domestic violence.

(12) Commencing January
1, 1994, records of incidents of domestic violence shall be submitted, in
accordance with procedures described in this subsection, to the Washington
association of ((sheriffs)) constables and police chiefs by all
law enforcement agencies. The Washington criminal justice training commission
shall amend its contract for collection of statewide crime data with the
Washington association of ((sheriffs)) constables and police
chiefs:

(a) To include a table,
in the annual report of crime in Washington produced by the Washington
association of ((sheriffs)) constables and police chiefs pursuant
to the contract, showing the total number of actual offenses and the number and
percent of the offenses that are domestic violence incidents for the following
crimes: (i) Criminal homicide, with subtotals for murder and nonnegligent
homicide and manslaughter by negligence; (ii) forcible rape, with subtotals for
rape by force and attempted forcible rape; (iii) robbery, with subtotals for
firearm, knife or cutting instrument, or other dangerous weapon, and strongarm
robbery; (iv) assault, with subtotals for firearm, knife or cutting instrument,
other dangerous weapon, hands, feet, aggravated, and other nonaggravated
assaults; (v) burglary, with subtotals for forcible entry, nonforcible unlawful
entry, and attempted forcible entry; (vi) larceny theft, except motor vehicle
theft; (vii) motor vehicle theft, with subtotals for autos, trucks and buses,
and other vehicles; (viii) arson; and (ix) violations of the provisions of a
protection order or no-contact order restraining the person from going onto the
grounds of or entering a residence, workplace, school, or day care, provided
that specific appropriations are subsequently made for the collection and
compilation of data regarding violations of protection orders or no-contact
orders;

(b) To require that the
table shall continue to be prepared and contained in the annual report of crime
in Washington until that time as comparable or more detailed information about
domestic violence incidents is available through the Washington state incident
based reporting system and the information is prepared and contained in the annual
report of crime in Washington; and

(c) To require that, in
consultation with interested persons, the Washington association of ((sheriffs))
constables and police chiefs prepare and disseminate procedures to all
law enforcement agencies in the state as to how the agencies shall code and
report domestic violence incidents to the Washington association of ((sheriffs))
constables and police chiefs.

Sec. 10. RCW 13.60.120 and 1999 c
168 s 3 are each amended to read as follows:

The advisory board on
missing and exploited children is established to advise the chief of the
Washington state patrol on the objectives, conduct, management, and
coordination of the various activities of the task force on missing and
exploited children.

(1) The chief of the
state patrol shall appoint five members to the advisory board: (a) One member
shall be a county prosecuting attorney or a representative and shall be
appointed in consultation with the elected county prosecutors; (b) two members
shall be a municipal police chief and a county sheriff, or their
representatives, and shall be appointed in consultation with the association of
((sheriffs)) constables and police chiefs under RCW 36.28A.010;
(c) one member shall be a representative of the state patrol; and (d) one
member shall be a representative of parents of missing or exploited children.

(2) A sixth member of
the board shall represent and be appointed by the attorney general.

(3) To improve
interagency communication and coordination, the chief of the state patrol shall
invite representatives of federal law enforcement agencies and state social
service agencies to participate in the advisory board.

(4) The members of the
board shall be qualified on the basis of knowledge and experience as may
contribute to the effective performance of the board's duties. The board shall
elect its own chair from among its members. Meetings of the board may be
convened at the call of the chair or by a majority of the members.

(5) The
term of each member of the board shall be two years and shall be conditioned
upon the member retaining the official position from which the member was
appointed.

Sec. 11. RCW 28B.10.569 and 1990
c 288 s 7 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) Each institution of
higher education with a commissioned police force shall report to the
Washington association of ((sheriffs)) constables and police
chiefs or its successor agency, on a monthly basis, crime statistics for the
Washington state uniform crime report, in the format required by the Washington
association of ((sheriffs)) constables and police chiefs, or its
successor agency. Institutions of higher education which do not have
commissioned police forces shall report crime statistics through appropriate
local law enforcement agencies.

(2) Each institution of
higher education shall publish and distribute a report which shall be updated
annually and which shall include the crime statistics as reported under
subsection (1) of this section for the most recent three-year period. Upon
request, the institution shall provide the report to every person who submits
an application for admission to either a main or branch campus, and to each new
employee at the time of employment. In its acknowledgement of receipt of the
formal application for admission, the institution shall notify the applicant of
the availability of such information. The information also shall be provided
on an annual basis to all students and employees. Institutions with more than one
campus shall provide the required information on a campus-by-campus basis.

(3) Each institution of
higher education shall provide to every new student and new employee, and upon
request to other interested persons, information which follows the general
categories for safety policies and procedures outlined in this section. Such
categories shall, at a minimum, include campus enrollments, campus nonstudent
work force profile, the number and duties of campus security personnel,
arrangements with state and local police, and policies on controlled
substances. Information for the most recent academic year also shall include a
description of any programs offered by an institution's student affairs or
services department, and by student government organizations regarding crime
prevention and counseling, including a directory of available services and
appropriate telephone numbers and physical locations of these services. In
addition, institutions maintaining student housing facilities shall include
information detailing security policies and programs.

Institutions with a
main campus and one or more branch campuses shall provide the information on a
campus-by-campus basis.

In the case of
community colleges, colleges shall provide such information to the main campuses
only and shall provide reasonable alternative information at any off-campus
centers and other affiliated college sites enrolling less than one hundred
students.

(4) Each institution
shall establish a task force which shall annually examine campus security and
safety issues. The task force shall review the report published and
distributed pursuant to this section in order to ensure the accuracy and
effectiveness of the report, and make any suggestions for improvement. This
task force shall include representation from the institution's administration,
faculty, staff, recognized student organization, and police or security
organization.

Sec. 12. RCW 35.21.334 and 1987 c
339 s 5 are each amended to read as follows:

Before making an
appointment in the office of chief of police or marshal, the appointing agency
shall complete a thorough background investigation of the candidate. The
Washington association of ((sheriffs)) constables and police
chiefs shall develop advisory procedures which may be used by the appointing
authority in completing its background investigation of candidates for the
office of chief of police or marshal.

Sec. 13. RCW 36.110.030 and 1995
c 399 s 45 are each amended to read as follows:

A statewide jail
industries board of directors is established. The board shall consist of the
following members:

(1) One sheriff and one
police chief, to be selected by the Washington association of ((sheriffs))
constables and police chiefs;

(2) One county
commissioner or one county councilmember to be selected by the Washington state
association of counties;

(3) One city official
to be selected by the association of Washington cities;

(4) Two jail
administrators to be selected by the Washington state jail association, one of
whom shall be from a county or a city with an established jail industries
program;

(5) One prosecuting
attorney to be selected by the Washington association of prosecuting attorneys;

(6) One administrator
from a city or county corrections department to be selected by the Washington
correctional association;

(7) One county clerk to
be selected by the Washington association of county clerks;

(8) Three representatives
from labor to be selected by the governor. The representatives may be chosen
from a list of nominations provided by statewide labor organizations
representing a cross-section of trade organizations;

(9) Three
representatives from business to be selected by the governor. The
representatives may be chosen from a list of nominations provided by statewide
business organizations representing a cross-section of businesses, industries,
and all sizes of employers;

(10) The governor's
representative from the employment security department;

(11) One member
representing crime victims, to be selected by the governor;

(12) One member
representing on-line law enforcement officers, to be selected by the governor;

(13) One member from
the department of community, trade, and economic development to be selected by
the governor;

(14) One member
representing higher education, vocational education, or adult basic education
to be selected by the governor; and

(15) The governor's
representative from the correctional industries division of the state
department of corrections shall be an ex officio member for the purpose of
coordination and cooperation between prison and jail industries and to further
a positive relationship between state and local government offender programs.

Sec. 14. RCW 38.52.530 and 2000 c
34 s 1 are each amended to read as follows:

The enhanced 911
advisory committee is created to advise and assist the state enhanced 911
coordinator in coordinating and facilitating the implementation and operation
of enhanced 911 throughout the state. The director shall appoint members of
the committee who represent diverse geographical areas of the state and include
state residents who are members of the national emergency number association,
the associated public communications officers Washington chapter, the
Washington state fire chiefs association, the Washington association of ((sheriffs))
constables and police chiefs, the Washington state council of fire
fighters, the Washington state council of police officers, the Washington
ambulance association, the state fire protection policy board, the Washington
fire commissioners association, the Washington state patrol, the association of
Washington cities, the Washington state association of counties, the utilities
and transportation commission or commission staff, and representatives of large
and small local exchange telephone companies. This section expires December
31, 2006.

Sec. 15. RCW 40.14.070 and 1999 c
326 s 2 are each amended to read as follows:

(1)(a) County,
municipal, and other local government agencies may request authority to destroy
noncurrent public records having no further administrative or legal value by
submitting to the division of archives and records management lists of such
records on forms prepared by the division. The archivist, a representative
appointed by the state auditor, and a representative appointed by the attorney
general shall constitute a committee, known as the local records committee,
which shall review such lists and which may veto the destruction of any or all
items contained therein.

(b) A local government
agency, as an alternative to submitting lists, may elect to establish a records
control program based on recurring disposition schedules recommended by the
agency to the local records committee. The schedules are to be submitted on
forms provided by the division of archives and records management to the local
records committee, which may either veto, approve, or amend the schedule.
Approval of such schedule or amended schedule shall be by unanimous vote of the
local records committee. Upon such approval, the schedule shall constitute
authority for the local government agency to destroy the records listed thereon,
after the required retention period, on a recurring basis until the schedule is
either amended or revised by the committee.

(2)(a) Except as
otherwise provided by law, no public records shall be destroyed until approved
for destruction by the local records committee. Official public records shall
not be destroyed unless:

(i) The records are six
or more years old;

(ii) The department of
origin of the records has made a satisfactory showing to the state records
committee that the retention of the records for a minimum of six years is both
unnecessary and uneconomical, particularly where lesser federal retention
periods for records generated by the state under federal programs have been
established; or

(iii) The originals of
official public records less than six years old have been copied or reproduced
by any photographic, photostatic, microfilm, miniature photographic, or other
process approved by the state archivist which accurately reproduces or forms a
durable medium for so reproducing the original.

An automatic reduction
of retention periods from seven to six years for official public records on
record retention schedules existing on June 10, 1982, shall not be made, but
the same shall be reviewed individually by the local records committee for
approval or disapproval of the change to a retention period of six years.

The state archivist may
furnish appropriate information, suggestions, and guidelines to local
government agencies for their assistance in the preparation of lists and
schedules or any other matter relating to the retention, preservation, or
destruction of records under this chapter. The local records committee may
adopt appropriate regulations establishing procedures to be followed in such
matters.

Records of county,
municipal, or other local government agencies, designated by the archivist as
of primarily historical interest, may be transferred to a recognized depository
agency.

(b) Records of
investigative reports prepared by any state, county, municipal, or other law
enforcement agency pertaining to sex offenders contained in chapter 9A.44 RCW
or sexually violent offenses as defined in RCW 71.09.020 that are not required
in the current operation of the law enforcement agency or for pending judicial
proceedings shall, following the expiration of the applicable schedule of the
law enforcement agency's retention of the records, be transferred to the
Washington association of ((sheriffs)) constables and police
chiefs for permanent electronic retention and retrieval. Upon electronic
retention of any document, the association shall be permitted to destroy the
paper copy of the document.

(c) Any record
transferred to the Washington association of ((sheriffs)) constables
and police chiefs pursuant to (b) of this subsection shall be deemed to no
longer constitute a public record pursuant to RCW 42.17.020 and shall be exempt
from public disclosure. Such records shall be disseminated only to criminal
justice agencies as defined in RCW 10.97.030 for the purpose of determining if
a sex offender met the criteria of a sexually violent predator as defined in
chapter 71.09 RCW.

Sec. 16. RCW 41.72.020 and 1994 c
89 s 2 are each amended to read as follows:

There is created the
state law enforcement medal of honor committee for nominating candidates for
the award of the state law enforcement medal of honor. The committee
membership consists of a representative from the governor's office, the
Washington state law enforcement association, the Washington state council of
police officers, the Washington association of ((sheriffs)) constables
and police chiefs, and the Washington state troopers association. The attorney
general shall serve as chair of the committee and shall designate a secretary
for the committee. The committee shall meet not less than semiannually to
consider candidates for nomination. The committee shall adopt rules
establishing the qualifications for the state law enforcement medal of honor,
the protocol governing the decoration, and the appurtenances necessary to the
implementation of this chapter.

Sec. 17. RCW 42.17.310 and 2000 c
134 s 3, 2000 c 56 s 1, and 2000 c 6 s 5 are each reenacted and amended to read
as follows:

(1) The following are
exempt from public inspection and copying:

(a) Personal
information in any files maintained for students in public schools, patients or
clients of public institutions or public health agencies, or welfare
recipients.

(b) Personal
information in files maintained for employees, appointees, or elected officials
of any public agency to the extent that disclosure would violate their right to
privacy.

(c) Information
required of any taxpayer in connection with the assessment or collection of any
tax if the disclosure of the information to other persons would (i) be
prohibited to such persons by RCW 84.08.210, 82.32.330, 84.40.020, or 84.40.340
or (ii) violate the taxpayer's right to privacy or result in unfair competitive
disadvantage to the taxpayer.

(d) Specific
intelligence information and specific investigative records compiled by
investigative, law enforcement, and penology agencies, and state agencies
vested with the responsibility to discipline members of any profession, the
nondisclosure of which is essential to effective law enforcement or for the
protection of any person's right to privacy.

(e) Information
revealing the identity of persons who are witnesses to or victims of crime or
who file complaints with investigative, law enforcement, or penology agencies,
other than the public disclosure commission, if disclosure would endanger any
person's life, physical safety, or property. If at the time a complaint is
filed the complainant, victim or witness indicates a desire for disclosure or
nondisclosure, such desire shall govern. However, all complaints filed with
the public disclosure commission about any elected official or candidate for
public office must be made in writing and signed by the complainant under oath.

(f) Test questions,
scoring keys, and other examination data used to administer a license,
employment, or academic examination.

(g) Except as provided
by chapter 8.26 RCW, the contents of real estate appraisals, made for or by any
agency relative to the acquisition or sale of property, until the project or
prospective sale is abandoned or until such time as all of the property has
been acquired or the property to which the sale appraisal relates is sold, but
in no event shall disclosure be denied for more than three years after the appraisal.

(h) Valuable formulae,
designs, drawings, computer source code or object code, and research data
obtained by any agency within five years of the request for disclosure when
disclosure would produce private gain and public loss.

(i) Preliminary drafts,
notes, recommendations, and intra-agency memorandums in which opinions are
expressed or policies formulated or recommended except that a specific record
shall not be exempt when publicly cited by an agency in connection with any
agency action.

(j) Records which are
relevant to a controversy to which an agency is a party but which records would
not be available to another party under the rules of pretrial discovery for
causes pending in the superior courts.

(k) Records, maps, or
other information identifying the location of archaeological sites in order to
avoid the looting or depredation of such sites.

(l) Any library record,
the primary purpose of which is to maintain control of library materials, or to
gain access to information, which discloses or could be used to disclose the
identity of a library user.

(m) Financial
information supplied by or on behalf of a person, firm, or corporation for the
purpose of qualifying to submit a bid or proposal for (i) a ferry system
construction or repair contract as required by RCW 47.60.680 through 47.60.750
or (ii) highway construction or improvement as required by RCW 47.28.070.

(n) Railroad company
contracts filed prior to July 28, 1991, with the utilities and transportation
commission under RCW 81.34.070, except that the summaries of the contracts are
open to public inspection and copying as otherwise provided by this chapter.

(o) Financial and
commercial information and records supplied by private persons pertaining to
export services provided pursuant to chapter 43.163 RCW and chapter 53.31 RCW,
and by persons pertaining to export projects pursuant to RCW 43.23.035.

(p) Financial
disclosures filed by private vocational schools under chapters 28B.85 and
28C.10 RCW.

(q) Records filed with
the utilities and transportation commission or attorney general under RCW
80.04.095 that a court has determined are confidential under RCW 80.04.095.

(r) Financial and
commercial information and records supplied by businesses or individuals during
application for loans or program services provided by chapters 43.163, 43.160,
43.330, and 43.168 RCW, or during application for economic development loans or
program services provided by any local agency.

(s) Membership lists or
lists of members or owners of interests of units in timeshare projects,
subdivisions, camping resorts, condominiums, land developments, or
common-interest communities affiliated with such projects, regulated by the
department of licensing, in the files or possession of the department.

(t) All applications
for public employment, including the names of applicants, resumes, and other
related materials submitted with respect to an applicant.

(u) The residential
addresses and residential telephone numbers of employees or volunteers of a
public agency which are held by the agency in personnel records, employment or
volunteer rosters, or mailing lists of employees or volunteers.

(v) The residential
addresses and residential telephone numbers of the customers of a public utility
contained in the records or lists held by the public utility of which they are
customers, except that this information may be released to the division of
child support or the agency or firm providing child support enforcement for
another state under Title IV-D of the federal social security act, for the
establishment, enforcement, or modification of a support order.

(w)(i) The federal
social security number of individuals governed under chapter 18.130 RCW
maintained in the files of the department of health, except this exemption does
not apply to requests made directly to the department from federal, state, and
local agencies of government, and national and state licensing, credentialing,
investigatory, disciplinary, and examination organizations; (ii) the current
residential address and current residential telephone number of a health care
provider governed under chapter 18.130 RCW maintained in the files of the
department, if the provider requests that this information be withheld from
public inspection and copying, and provides to the department an accurate
alternate or business address and business telephone number. On or after
January 1, 1995, the current residential address and residential telephone
number of a health care provider governed under RCW 18.130.040 maintained in
the files of the department shall automatically be withheld from public
inspection and copying unless the provider specifically requests the
information be released, and except as provided for under RCW 42.17.260(9).

(x) Information
obtained by the board of pharmacy as provided in RCW 69.45.090.

(y) Information
obtained by the board of pharmacy or the department of health and its
representatives as provided in RCW 69.41.044, 69.41.280, and 18.64.420.

(z) Financial information,
business plans, examination reports, and any information produced or obtained
in evaluating or examining a business and industrial development corporation
organized or seeking certification under chapter 31.24 RCW.

(aa) Financial and
commercial information supplied to the state investment board by any person
when the information relates to the investment of public trust or retirement
funds and when disclosure would result in loss to such funds or in private loss
to the providers of this information.

(bb) Financial and
valuable trade information under RCW 51.36.120.

(cc) Client records
maintained by an agency that is a domestic violence program as defined in RCW
70.123.020 or 70.123.075 or a rape crisis center as defined in RCW 70.125.030.

(dd) Information that
identifies a person who, while an agency employee: (i) Seeks advice, under an
informal process established by the employing agency, in order to ascertain his
or her rights in connection with a possible unfair practice under chapter 49.60
RCW against the person; and (ii) requests his or her identity or any
identifying information not be disclosed.

(ee) Investigative
records compiled by an employing agency conducting a current investigation of a
possible unfair practice under chapter 49.60 RCW or of a possible violation of
other federal, state, or local laws prohibiting discrimination in employment.

(ff) Business related
information protected from public inspection and copying under RCW 15.86.110.

(gg) Financial,
commercial, operations, and technical and research information and data
submitted to or obtained by the clean Washington center in applications for, or
delivery of, program services under chapter 70.95H RCW.

(hh) Information and
documents created specifically for, and collected and maintained by a quality
improvement committee pursuant to RCW 43.70.510 or 70.41.200, or by a peer
review committee under RCW 4.24.250, regardless of which agency is in
possession of the information and documents.

(ii) Personal
information in files maintained in a data base created under RCW 43.07.360.

(jj) Financial and
commercial information requested by the public stadium authority from any
person or organization that leases or uses the stadium and exhibition center as
defined in RCW 36.102.010.

(kk) Names of
individuals residing in emergency or transitional housing that are furnished to
the department of revenue or a county assessor in order to substantiate a claim
for property tax exemption under RCW 84.36.043.

(ll) The names,
residential addresses, residential telephone numbers, and other individually
identifiable records held by an agency in relation to a vanpool, carpool, or
other ride-sharing program or service. However, these records may be disclosed
to other persons who apply for ride-matching services and who need that
information in order to identify potential riders or drivers with whom to share
rides.

(mm) The personally
identifying information of current or former participants or applicants in a
paratransit or other transit service operated for the benefit of persons with
disabilities or elderly persons.

(nn) The personally
identifying information of persons who acquire and use transit passes and other
fare payment media including, but not limited to, stored value smart cards and
magnetic strip cards, except that an agency may disclose this information to a
person, employer, educational institution, or other entity that is responsible,
in whole or in part, for payment of the cost of acquiring or using a transit
pass or other fare payment media, or to the news media when reporting on public
transportation or public safety. This information may also be disclosed at the
agency's discretion to governmental agencies or groups concerned with public
transportation or public safety.

(oo) Proprietary
financial and commercial information that the submitting entity, with review by
the department of health, specifically identifies at the time it is submitted
and that is provided to or obtained by the department of health in connection
with an application for, or the supervision of, an antitrust exemption sought
by the submitting entity under RCW 43.72.310. If a request for such
information is received, the submitting entity must be notified of the
request. Within ten business days of receipt of the notice, the submitting
entity shall provide a written statement of the continuing need for
confidentiality, which shall be provided to the requester. Upon receipt of
such notice, the department of health shall continue to treat information
designated under this section as exempt from disclosure. If the requester
initiates an action to compel disclosure under this chapter, the submitting
entity must be joined as a party to demonstrate the continuing need for
confidentiality.

(pp) Records maintained
by the board of industrial insurance appeals that are related to appeals of
crime victims' compensation claims filed with the board under RCW 7.68.110.

(qq) Financial and
commercial information supplied by or on behalf of a person, firm, corporation,
or entity under chapter 28B.95 RCW relating to the purchase or sale of tuition
units and contracts for the purchase of multiple tuition units.

(rr) Any records of
investigative reports prepared by any state, county, municipal, or other law
enforcement agency pertaining to sex offenses contained in chapter 9A.44 RCW or
sexually violent offenses as defined in RCW 71.09.020, which have been
transferred to the Washington association of ((sheriffs)) constables
and police chiefs for permanent electronic retention and retrieval pursuant to
RCW 40.14.070(2)(b).

(ss) Credit card
numbers, debit card numbers, electronic check numbers, card expiration dates,
or bank or other financial account numbers supplied to an agency for the
purpose of electronic transfer of funds, except when disclosure is expressly
required by law.

(tt) Financial
information, including but not limited to account numbers and values, and other
identification numbers supplied by or on behalf of a person, firm, corporation,
limited liability company, partnership, or other entity related to an
application for a liquor license, gambling license, or lottery retail license.

(uu) Records maintained
by the employment security department and subject to chapter 50.13 RCW if
provided to another individual or organization for operational, research, or
evaluation purposes.

(vv) Individually
identifiable information received by the work force training and education
coordinating board for research or evaluation purposes.

(2) Except for information
described in subsection (1)(c)(i) of this section and confidential income data
exempted from public inspection pursuant to RCW 84.40.020, the exemptions of
this section are inapplicable to the extent that information, the disclosure of
which would violate personal privacy or vital governmental interests, can be
deleted from the specific records sought. No exemption may be construed to
permit the nondisclosure of statistical information not descriptive of any
readily identifiable person or persons.

(3) Inspection or
copying of any specific records exempt under the provisions of this section may
be permitted if the superior court in the county in which the record is
maintained finds, after a hearing with notice thereof to every person in
interest and the agency, that the exemption of such records is clearly
unnecessary to protect any individual's right of privacy or any vital
governmental function.

(4) Agency responses
refusing, in whole or in part, inspection of any public record shall include a
statement of the specific exemption authorizing the withholding of the record
(or part) and a brief explanation of how the exemption applies to the record
withheld.

Sec. 18. RCW 43.43.490 and 2000 c
118 s 2 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) The Washington
state patrol shall work with the criminal justice training commission and the
Washington association of ((sheriffs)) constables and police
chiefs to develop (a) further criteria for collection and evaluation of the
data collected under RCW 43.43.480, and (b) training materials for use by the
state patrol and local law enforcement agencies on the issue of racial
profiling.

(2) The
Washington state patrol, criminal justice training commission, and Washington
association of ((sheriffs)) constables and police chiefs shall
encourage local law enforcement agencies to voluntarily collect the data set
forth under RCW 43.43.480(1).

Sec. 19. RCW 43.43.655 and 1989 c
271 s 235 are each amended to read as follows:

A special narcotics
enforcement unit is established within the Washington state patrol drug control
assistance unit. The unit shall be coordinated between the Washington state
patrol, the attorney general, and the Washington association of ((sheriffs))
constables and police chiefs. The initial unit shall consist of
attorneys, investigators, and the necessary accountants and support staff. It
is the responsibility of the unit to: (1) Conduct criminal narcotic
profiteering investigations and assist with prosecutions, (2) train local
undercover narcotic agents, and (3) coordinate federal, state, and local
interjurisdictional narcotic investigations.

Sec. 20. RCW 43.43.858 and 2000 c
38 s 1 are each amended to read as follows:

There is hereby created
the organized crime advisory board of the state of Washington. The board shall
consist of fourteen voting and two nonvoting members.

The lieutenant governor
shall appoint four members of the senate to the board, no more than two of whom
shall be from the same political party.

The governor shall
appoint six members to the board. Two members shall be county prosecuting
attorneys and shall be appointed from a list of four county prosecutors agreed
upon and submitted to the governor by the elected county prosecutors. One
member shall be a municipal police chief, and one member shall be a county
sheriff, both of whom shall be appointed from a list of three police chiefs and
three sheriffs agreed upon and submitted to the governor by the association of
((sheriffs)) constables and police chiefs (RCW 36.28A.010). One
member shall be a retired judge of a court of record. One member shall be the
secretary of corrections or the secretary's designee.

The United States
attorneys for the western and eastern districts of Washington shall be
requested to serve on the board as nonvoting members and shall not be eligible
to serve as chairperson.

The speaker of the
house shall appoint four members of the house of representatives to the board,
no more than two of whom shall be from the same political party.

The members of the
board shall be qualified on the basis of knowledge and experience in matters
relating to crime prevention and security or with such other abilities as may
be expected to contribute to the effective performance of the board's duties.
The members of the board shall meet with the chief of the Washington state
patrol at least four times a year to perform the duties enumerated in RCW
43.43.862 and to discuss any other matters related to organized crime.
Additional meetings of the board may be convened at the call of the chairperson
or by a majority of the members. The board shall elect its own chairperson from
among its members. Legislative members shall receive reimbursement for travel
expenses incurred in the performance of their duties in accordance with RCW
44.04.120, and the other members in accordance with RCW 43.03.050 and
43.03.060.

Sec. 21. RCW 43.101.224 and 1999
c 389 s 2 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) Ongoing specialized
training shall be provided for persons responsible for investigating child
sexual abuse. Training participants shall have the opportunity to practice
interview skills and receive feedback from instructors.

(2) The commission, the
department of social and health services, the Washington association of ((sheriffs))
constables and police chiefs, and the Washington association of
prosecuting attorneys shall design and implement statewide training that
contains consistent elements for persons engaged in the interviewing of
children for child sexual abuse cases, including law enforcement, prosecution,
and child protective services.

(3) The training
shall: (a) Be based on research-based practices and standards; (b) minimize
the trauma of all persons who are interviewed during abuse investigations; (c)
provide methods of reducing the number of investigative interviews necessary
whenever possible; (d) assure, to the extent possible, that investigative
interviews are thorough, objective, and complete; (e) recognize needs of
special populations, such as persons with developmental disabilities; (f)
recognize the nature and consequences of victimization; (g) require
investigative interviews to be conducted in a manner most likely to permit the
interviewed persons the maximum emotional comfort under the circumstances; (h)
address record retention and retrieval; and (i) documentation of investigative
interviews.

Sec. 22. RCW 43.101.270 and 1991
c 267 s 2 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) Each year the
criminal justice training commission shall offer an intensive, integrated
training session on investigating and prosecuting sexual assault cases. The
training shall place particular emphasis on the development of professionalism
and sensitivity towards the victim and the victim's family.

(2) The commission
shall seek advice from the Washington association of prosecuting attorneys, the
Washington defender association, the Washington association of ((sheriffs))
constables and police chiefs, and the Washington coalition of sexual
assault programs.

(3) The training shall
be an integrated approach to sexual assault cases so that prosecutors, law
enforcement, defenders, and victim advocates can all benefit from the training.

(4) The training shall
be self-supporting through fees charged to the participants of the training.

Sec. 23. RCW 43.101.315 and 1997
c 351 s 3 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) The board on law
enforcement training standards and education consists of thirteen members,
appointed by the executive director and subject to approval by the commission.
Members must be selected as follows: (a) Three must represent county law
enforcement agencies, at least two of whom must be incumbent sheriffs; (b)
three must represent city police agencies, at least two of whom must be
incumbent police chiefs, one of whom shall be from a city under five thousand;
(c) one must represent community colleges; (d) one must represent the four-year
colleges and universities; (e) four must represent the council of police
officers, two of whom must be training officers; and (f) one must represent
tribal law enforcement in Washington. The six officers under (a) and (b) of
this subsection may be appointed by the executive director only after the
Washington association of ((sheriffs)) constables and police
chiefs provides the director with the names of qualified officers. The four
officers under (e) of this subsection may be appointed by the executive
director only after the council of police officers provides the director with
the names of qualified officers.

(2) The board on
correctional training standards and education consists of fourteen members,
appointed by the executive director and subject to approval by the commission.
Members must be selected as follows: (a) Three must be employed in the state
correctional system; (b) three must be employed in county correctional systems;
(c) two must be employed in juvenile corrections or probation, one at the local
level and the other at the state level; (d) two must be employed in community
corrections; (e) one must represent community colleges; (f) one must represent
four-year colleges and universities; and (g) two must be additional persons
with experience and interest in correctional training standards and education.
At least one of the members appointed under (a) of this subsection and at least
one of the members appointed under (b) of this subsection must be currently
employed as front line correctional officers.

Sec. 24. RCW 43.103.040 and 1995
c 398 s 5 are each amended to read as follows:

The council shall
consist of twelve members who shall be selected as follows: One county
coroner; one county prosecutor; one county prosecutor who also serves as ex
officio county coroner; one county medical examiner; one county sheriff; one
chief of police; the chief of the state patrol; two members of a county
legislative authority; one pathologist who is currently in private practice;
and two members of a city legislative authority.

The governor shall
appoint members to the council from among the nominees submitted for each
position as follows: The Washington association of county officials shall
submit two nominees each for the coroner position and the medical examiner
position; the Washington state association of counties shall submit two
nominees each for the two county legislative authority positions; the
association of Washington cities shall submit two nominees each for the two
city legislative authority positions; the Washington association of prosecuting
attorneys shall submit two nominees each for the county prosecutor-ex officio
county coroner and for the county prosecutor position; the Washington
association of ((sheriffs)) constables and police chiefs shall
submit two nominees each for the county sheriff position and the chief of
police position; and the Washington association of pathologists shall submit
two nominees for the private pathologist position.

Sec. 25. RCW 43.330.190 and 1999
c 303 s 1 are each amended to read as follows:

Counties may submit a
petition for relief to the office of public defense for reimbursement of
extraordinary criminal justice costs. Extraordinary criminal justice costs are
defined as those associated with investigation, prosecution, indigent defense,
jury impanelment, expert witnesses, interpreters, incarceration, and other
adjudication costs of aggravated murder cases.

(1) The office of
public defense, in consultation with the Washington association of prosecuting
attorneys and the Washington association of ((sheriffs)) constables
and police chiefs, shall develop procedures for processing the petitions, for
auditing the veracity of the petitions, and for prioritizing the petitions.
Prioritization of the petitions shall be based on, but not limited to, such
factors as disproportionate fiscal impact relative to the county budget,
efficient use of resources, and whether the costs are extraordinary and could
not be reasonably accommodated and anticipated in the normal budget process.

(2) Before January 1st
of each year, the office of public defense, in consultation with the Washington
association of prosecuting attorneys and the Washington association of ((sheriffs))
constables and police chiefs, shall develop and submit to the
appropriate fiscal committees of the senate and house of representatives a
prioritized list of submitted petitions that are recommended for funding by the
legislature.

Sec. 26. RCW 72.09.300 and 1996 c
232 s 7 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) Every county
legislative authority shall by resolution or ordinance establish a local law
and justice council. The county legislative authority shall determine the size
and composition of the council, which shall include the county sheriff and a
representative of the municipal police departments within the county, the
county prosecutor and a representative of the municipal prosecutors within the
county, a representative of the city legislative authorities within the county,
a representative of the county's superior, juvenile, district, and municipal courts,
the county jail administrator, the county clerk, the county risk manager, and
the secretary of corrections. Officials designated may appoint
representatives.

(2) A combination of
counties may establish a local law and justice council by intergovernmental
agreement. The agreement shall comply with the requirements of this section.

(3) The local law and
justice council shall develop a local law and justice plan for the county. The
council shall design the elements and scope of the plan, subject to final
approval by the county legislative authority. The general intent of the plan
shall include seeking means to maximize local resources including personnel and
facilities, reduce duplication of services, and share resources between local
and state government in order to accomplish local efficiencies without
diminishing effectiveness. The plan shall also include a section on jail
management. This section may include the following elements:

(a) A description of
current jail conditions, including whether the jail is overcrowded;

(b) A description of
potential alternatives to incarceration;

(c) A description of
current jail resources;

(d) A description of
the jail population as it presently exists and how it is projected to change in
the future;

(e) A description of
projected future resource requirements;

(f) A proposed action
plan, which shall include recommendations to maximize resources, maximize the
use of intermediate sanctions, minimize overcrowding, avoid duplication of
services, and effectively manage the jail and the offender population;

(g) A list of proposed
advisory jail standards and methods to effect periodic quality assurance
inspections of the jail;

(h) A proposed plan to
collect, synthesize, and disseminate technical information concerning local
criminal justice activities, facilities, and procedures;

(i) A description of
existing and potential services for offenders including employment services,
substance abuse treatment, mental health services, and housing referral
services.

(4) The council may
propose other elements of the plan, which shall be subject to review and
approval by the county legislative authority, prior to their inclusion into the
plan.

(5) The county
legislative authority may request technical assistance in developing or
implementing the plan from other units or agencies of state or local
government, which shall include the department, the office of financial
management, and the Washington association of ((sheriffs)) constables
and police chiefs.

(6) Upon receiving a
request for assistance from a county, the department may provide the requested
assistance.

(7) The secretary may
adopt rules for the submittal, review, and approval of all requests for
assistance made to the department. The secretary may also appoint an advisory
committee of local and state government officials to recommend policies and
procedures relating to the state and local correctional systems and to assist
the department in providing technical assistance to local governments. The
committee shall include representatives of the county sheriffs, the police
chiefs, the county prosecuting attorneys, the county and city legislative
authorities, and the jail administrators. The secretary may contract with
other state and local agencies and provide funding in order to provide the
assistance requested by counties.

(8) The department
shall establish a base level of state correctional services, which shall be
determined and distributed in a consistent manner statewide. The department's
contributions to any local government, approved pursuant to this section, shall
not operate to reduce this base level of services.

(9) The council shall
establish an advisory committee on juvenile justice proportionality. The
council shall appoint the county juvenile court administrator and at least five
citizens as advisory committee members. The citizen advisory committee members
shall be representative of the county's ethnic and geographic diversity. The
advisory committee members shall serve two-year terms and may be reappointed.
The duties of the advisory committee include:

(a) Monitoring and
reporting to the sentencing guidelines commission on the proportionality,
effectiveness, and cultural relevance of:

(i) The rehabilitative
services offered by county and state institutions to juvenile offenders; and

(ii) The rehabilitative
services offered in conjunction with diversions, deferred dispositions,
community supervision, and parole;

(b) Reviewing citizen
complaints regarding bias or disproportionality in that county's juvenile
justice system;

(c) By September 1 of
each year, beginning with 1995, submit to the sentencing guidelines commission
a report summarizing the advisory committee's findings under (a) and (b) of
this subsection.

Sec. 27. RCW 74.14B.010 and 1999
c 389 s 5 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) Caseworkers
employed in children services shall meet minimum standards established by the
department of social and health services. Comprehensive training for caseworkers
shall be completed before such caseworkers are assigned to case-carrying
responsibilities without direct supervision. Intermittent, part-time, and
standby workers shall be subject to the same minimum standards and training.

(2) Ongoing specialized
training shall be provided for persons responsible for investigating child
sexual abuse. Training participants shall have the opportunity to practice
interview skills and receive feedback from instructors.

(3) The department, the
criminal justice training commission, the Washington association of ((sheriffs))
constables and police chiefs, and the Washington association of
prosecuting attorneys shall design and implement statewide training that
contains consistent elements for persons engaged in the interviewing of
children, including law enforcement, prosecution, and child protective
services.

(4) The training
shall: (a) Be based on research-based practices and standards; (b) minimize
the trauma of all persons who are interviewed during abuse investigations; (c)
provide methods of reducing the number of investigative interviews necessary
whenever possible; (d) assure, to the extent possible, that investigative
interviews are thorough, objective, and complete; (e) recognize needs of
special populations, such as persons with developmental disabilities; (f)
recognize the nature and consequences of victimization; (g) require
investigative interviews to be conducted in a manner most likely to permit the
interviewed persons the maximum emotional comfort under the circumstances; (h)
address record retention and retrieval; and (i) documentation of investigative
interviews.

Sec. 28. RCW 82.14.310 and 1999 c
309 s 920 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) The county criminal
justice assistance account is created in the state treasury. Beginning in
fiscal year 2000, the state treasurer shall transfer into the county criminal
justice assistance account from the general fund the sum of twenty-three million
two hundred thousand dollars divided into four equal deposits occurring on July
1, October 1, January 1, and April 1. For each fiscal year thereafter, the
state treasurer shall increase the total transfer by the fiscal growth factor,
as defined in RCW 43.135.025, forecast for that fiscal year by the office of
financial management in November of the preceding year.

(2) The moneys
deposited in the county criminal justice assistance account for distribution
under this section, less any moneys appropriated for purposes under subsection
(4) of this section, shall be distributed at such times as distributions are
made under RCW 82.44.150 and on the relative basis of each county's funding
factor as determined under this subsection.

(a) A county's funding
factor is the sum of:

(i) The population of
the county, divided by one thousand, and multiplied by two-tenths;

(ii) The crime rate of
the county, multiplied by three-tenths; and

(iii) The annual number
of criminal cases filed in the county superior court, for each one thousand in
population, multiplied by five-tenths.

(b) Under this section
and RCW 82.14.320 and 82.14.330:

(i) The population of
the county or city shall be as last determined by the office of financial
management;

(ii) The crime rate of
the county or city is the annual occurrence of specified criminal offenses, as
calculated in the most recent annual report on crime in Washington state as
published by the Washington association of ((sheriffs)) constables
and police chiefs, for each one thousand in population;

(iii) The annual number
of criminal cases filed in the county superior court shall be determined by the
most recent annual report of the courts of Washington, as published by the
office of the administrator for the courts;

(iv) Distributions and
eligibility for distributions in the 1989‑91 biennium shall be based on
1988 figures for both the crime rate as described under (ii) of this subsection
and the annual number of criminal cases that are filed as described under (iii)
of this subsection. Future distributions shall be based on the most recent
figures for both the crime rate as described under (ii) of this subsection and
the annual number of criminal cases that are filed as described under (iii) of
this subsection.

(3) Moneys distributed
under this section shall be expended exclusively for criminal justice purposes
and shall not be used to replace or supplant existing funding. Criminal
justice purposes are defined as activities that substantially assist the
criminal justice system, which may include circumstances where ancillary
benefit to the civil or juvenile justice system occurs, and which includes (a)
domestic violence services such as those provided by domestic violence
programs, community advocates, and legal advocates, as defined in RCW
70.123.020, and (b) during the 1999-2001 fiscal biennium, juvenile
dispositional hearings relating to petitions for at-risk youth, truancy, and
children in need of services. Existing funding for purposes of this subsection
is defined as calendar year 1989 actual operating expenditures for criminal
justice purposes. Calendar year 1989 actual operating expenditures for
criminal justice purposes exclude the following: Expenditures for
extraordinary events not likely to reoccur, changes in contract provisions for
criminal justice services, beyond the control of the local jurisdiction
receiving the services, and major nonrecurring capital expenditures.

(4) Not more than five
percent of the funds deposited to the county criminal justice assistance
account shall be available for appropriations for enhancements to the state
patrol crime laboratory system and the continuing costs related to these
enhancements. Funds appropriated from this account for such enhancements shall
not supplant existing funds from the state general fund.

Sec. 29. RCW 82.14.320 and 1998 c
321 s 12 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) The municipal
criminal justice assistance account is created in the state treasury.
Beginning in fiscal year 2000, the state treasurer shall transfer into the
municipal criminal justice assistance account for distribution under this
section from the general fund the sum of four million six hundred thousand
dollars divided into four equal deposits occurring on July 1, October 1,
January 1, and April 1. For each fiscal year thereafter, the state treasurer
shall increase the total transfer by the fiscal growth factor, as defined in
RCW 43.135.025, forecast for that fiscal year by the office of financial
management in November of the preceding year.

(2) No city may receive
a distribution under this section from the municipal criminal justice
assistance account unless:

(a) The city has a crime
rate in excess of one hundred twenty-five percent of the statewide average as
calculated in the most recent annual report on crime in Washington state as
published by the Washington association of ((sheriffs)) constables
and police chiefs;

(b) The city has levied
the tax authorized in RCW 82.14.030(2) at the maximum rate or the tax
authorized in RCW 82.46.010(3) at the maximum rate; and

(c) The city has a per
capita yield from the tax imposed under RCW 82.14.030(1) at the maximum rate of
less than one hundred fifty percent of the statewide average per capita yield
for all cities from such local sales and use tax.

(3) The moneys
deposited in the municipal criminal justice assistance account for distribution
under this section, less any moneys appropriated for purposes under subsection
(7) of this section, shall be distributed at such times as distributions are
made under RCW 82.44.150. The distributions shall be made as follows:

(a) Unless reduced by
this subsection, thirty percent of the moneys shall be distributed ratably
based on population as last determined by the office of financial management to
those cities eligible under subsection (2) of this section that have a crime
rate determined under subsection (2)(a) of this section which is greater than
one hundred seventy-five percent of the statewide average crime rate. No city
may receive more than fifty percent of any moneys distributed under this
subsection (a) but, if a city distribution is reduced as a result of exceeding
the fifty percent limitation, the amount not distributed shall be distributed
under (b) of this subsection.

(b) The remainder of
the moneys, including any moneys not distributed in subsection (2)(a) of this
section, shall be distributed to all cities eligible under subsection (2) of
this section ratably based on population as last determined by the office of
financial management.

(4) No city may receive
more than thirty percent of all moneys distributed under subsection (3) of this
section.

(5) Notwithstanding
other provisions of this section, the distributions to any city that
substantially decriminalizes or repeals its criminal code after July 1, 1990,
and that does not reimburse the county for costs associated with criminal cases
under RCW 3.50.800 or 3.50.805(2), shall be made to the county in which the
city is located.

(6) Moneys distributed
under this section shall be expended exclusively for criminal justice purposes
and shall not be used to replace or supplant existing funding. Criminal
justice purposes are defined as activities that substantially assist the
criminal justice system, which may include circumstances where ancillary
benefit to the civil justice system occurs, and which includes domestic
violence services such as those provided by domestic violence programs,
community advocates, and legal advocates, as defined in RCW 70.123.020, and
publications and public educational efforts designed to provide information and
assistance to parents in dealing with runaway or at-risk youth. Existing
funding for purposes of this subsection is defined as calendar year 1989 actual
operating expenditures for criminal justice purposes. Calendar year 1989
actual operating expenditures for criminal justice purposes exclude the
following: Expenditures for extraordinary events not likely to reoccur,
changes in contract provisions for criminal justice services, beyond the
control of the local jurisdiction receiving the services, and major
nonrecurring capital expenditures.

(7) Not more than five
percent of the funds deposited to the municipal criminal justice assistance
account shall be available for appropriations for enhancements to the state
patrol crime laboratory system and the continuing costs related to these
enhancements. Funds appropriated from this account for such enhancements shall
not supplant existing funds from the state general fund.

Sec. 30. RCW 82.14.330 and 1998 c
321 s 13 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) Beginning in fiscal
year 2000, the state treasurer shall transfer into the municipal criminal
justice assistance account for distribution under this section from the general
fund the sum of four million six hundred thousand dollars divided into four
equal deposits occurring on July 1, October 1, January 1, and April 1. For each
fiscal year thereafter, the state treasurer shall increase the total transfer
by the fiscal growth factor, as defined in RCW 43.135.025, forecast for that
fiscal year by the office of financial management in November of the preceding
year. The moneys deposited in the municipal criminal justice assistance
account for distribution under this section, less any moneys appropriated for
purposes under subsection (4) of this section, shall be distributed to the
cities of the state as follows:

(a) Twenty percent
appropriated for distribution shall be distributed to cities with a three-year
average violent crime rate for each one thousand in population in excess of one
hundred fifty percent of the statewide three-year average violent crime rate for
each one thousand in population. The three-year average violent crime rate
shall be calculated using the violent crime rates for each of the preceding
three years from the annual reports on crime in Washington state as published
by the Washington association of ((sheriffs)) constables and
police chiefs. Moneys shall be distributed under this subsection (1)(a)
ratably based on population as last determined by the office of financial
management, but no city may receive more than one dollar per capita. Moneys
remaining undistributed under this subsection at the end of each calendar year
shall be distributed to the criminal justice training commission to reimburse
participating city law enforcement agencies with ten or fewer full-time
commissioned patrol officers the cost of temporary replacement of each officer
who is enrolled in basic law enforcement training, as provided in RCW
43.101.200.

(b) Sixteen percent
shall be distributed to cities ratably based on population as last determined
by the office of financial management, but no city may receive less than one
thousand dollars.

The moneys deposited in
the municipal criminal justice assistance account for distribution under this
subsection shall be distributed at such times as distributions are made under
RCW 82.44.150.

Moneys distributed
under this subsection shall be expended exclusively for criminal justice
purposes and shall not be used to replace or supplant existing funding.
Criminal justice purposes are defined as activities that substantially assist
the criminal justice system, which may include circumstances where ancillary
benefit to the civil justice system occurs, and which includes domestic
violence services such as those provided by domestic violence programs,
community advocates, and legal advocates, as defined in RCW 70.123.020.
Existing funding for purposes of this subsection is defined as calendar year
1989 actual operating expenditures for criminal justice purposes. Calendar
year 1989 actual operating expenditures for criminal justice purposes exclude
the following: Expenditures for extraordinary events not likely to reoccur,
changes in contract provisions for criminal justice services, beyond the
control of the local jurisdiction receiving the services, and major
nonrecurring capital expenditures.

(2) In addition to the
distributions under subsection (1) of this section:

(a) Fourteen percent
shall be distributed to cities that have initiated innovative law enforcement
strategies, including alternative sentencing and crime prevention programs. No
city may receive more than one dollar per capita under this subsection (2)(a).

(b) Twenty percent
shall be distributed to cities that have initiated programs to help at-risk
children or child abuse victim response programs. No city may receive more
than fifty cents per capita under this subsection (2)(b).

(c) Twenty percent
shall be distributed to cities that have initiated programs designed to reduce
the level of domestic violence within their jurisdictions or to provide
counseling for domestic violence victims. No city may receive more than fifty
cents per capita under this subsection (2)(c).

(d) Ten percent shall
be distributed to cities that contract with another governmental agency for a
majority of the city's law enforcement services.

Moneys distributed
under this subsection shall be distributed to those cities that submit funding
requests under this subsection to the department of community, trade, and
economic development based on criteria developed under RCW 82.14.335. Allocation
of funds shall be in proportion to the population of qualified jurisdictions,
but the distribution to a city shall not exceed the amount of funds requested.
Cities shall submit requests for program funding to the department of
community, trade, and economic development by November 1 of each year for
funding the following year. The department shall certify to the state
treasurer the cities eligible for funding under this subsection and the amount
of each allocation.

The moneys deposited in
the municipal criminal justice assistance account for distribution under this
subsection, less any moneys appropriated for purposes under subsection (4) of
this section, shall be distributed at the times as distributions are made under
RCW 82.44.150. Moneys remaining undistributed under this subsection at the end
of each calendar year shall be distributed to the criminal justice training
commission to reimburse participating city law enforcement agencies with ten or
fewer full-time commissioned patrol officers the cost of temporary replacement
of each officer who is enrolled in basic law enforcement training, as provided
in RCW 43.101.200.

If a city is found by
the state auditor to have expended funds received under this subsection in a
manner that does not comply with the criteria under which the moneys were
received, the city shall be ineligible to receive future distributions under
this subsection until the use of the moneys are justified to the satisfaction
of the director or are repaid to the state general fund. The director may
allow noncomplying use of moneys received under this subsection upon a showing
of hardship or other emergent need.

(3) Notwithstanding
other provisions of this section, the distributions to any city that
substantially decriminalizes or repeals its criminal code after July 1, 1990,
and that does not reimburse the county for costs associated with criminal cases
under RCW 3.50.800 or 3.50.805(2), shall be made to the county in which the
city is located.

(4) Not more than five
percent of the funds deposited to the municipal criminal justice assistance
account shall be available for appropriations for enhancements to the state
patrol crime laboratory system and the continuing costs related to these
enhancements. Funds appropriated from this account for such enhancements shall
not supplant existing funds from the state general fund.

Sec. 31. RCW 82.14.335 and 1995 c
399 s 213 are each amended to read as follows:

The
department of community, trade, and economic development shall adopt criteria
to be used in making grants to cities under RCW 82.14.330(2). In developing
the criteria, the department shall create a temporary advisory committee
consisting of the director of community, trade, and economic development, two
representatives nominated by the association of Washington cities, and two
representatives nominated by the Washington association of ((sheriffs)) constables
and police chiefs.

---
END ---