BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

_4 Sec. 1. RCW
46.61.660 and 1997 c 190 s 1 are each amended to read

_5 as follows:

_6 (1) It shall be unlawful for any person to
transport any living

_7 animal on the running board, fenders, hood, or other
outside part

_8 of any vehicle, including the bed of a pickup truck,
unless

_9 suitable harness, cage, or enclosure be provided
and so attached

10 as to protect such animal from falling or being thrown
therefrom.

11 (2) It shall be unlawful for any person to
transport any

12 persons upon the running board, fenders, hood, or
other outside

13 part of any vehicle, ((except that this provision
shall))

14 including the bed of a pickup truck.

15 (a) This subsection (2) does not apply to the
outside part of a

16 vehicle that is equipped with seats with seatbelts
and the person

17 is securely fastened in the seatbelt.

18 (b) This subsection (2) does not apply to
authorized emergency

p. 1 HB
1883

_1 vehicles or to solid waste collection vehicles that are
engaged in

_2 collecting solid waste or recyclables on route at speeds
of twenty

_3 miles per hour or less.

‑‑‑ END ‑‑‑

HB 1883 p. 2