BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF
WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1. RCW 43.20A.720 and 1992
c 144 s 2 are each amended to read as follows:

Unless the context
clearly requires otherwise, the definitions in this section apply throughout
this section and RCW 43.20A.725.

(1)
"Hearing impaired" means those persons who are certified to be deaf,
deaf-blind, or hard of hearing, and those persons who are certified to have a
hearing disability limiting their access to telecommunications.

(2) "Speech
impaired" means persons who are certified to be unable to speak or who are
certified to have a speech impairment limiting their access to
telecommunications.

(("Text
telephone (TT)," formerly known as a telecommunications device for the
deaf (TDD) means a telecommunications device that has a typewriter or computer
keyboard and a readable display that couples with the telephone, allowing
messages to be typed rather than spoken. The device allows a person to make a
telephone call directly to another person possessing similar equipment. The
conversation is typed through one machine to the other machine instead of
spoken.

"Telecommunications
relay service (TRS)" is a service for hearing and speech impaired people
who have a TT to call someone who does not have a TT or vice versa. The
service consists of several telephones being utilized by TRS communications
assistants who receive either TT or voice phone calls. If a TRS communications
assistant receives a phone call from a hearing or speech impaired person
wishing to call a hearing person, the operator will call the hearing person and
act as an intermediary by translating what is displayed on the TT to voice and
typing what is voiced into the TT to be read by the hearing or speech impaired
caller. This process can also be reversed with a hearing person calling a deaf
person through the telecommunications relay service. "TRS program"
as used in this chapter includes both the relay function and TTs.

"Qualified
trainer" is a person who is knowledgeable about TTs, signal devices, and
amplifying accessories; familiar with the technical aspects of equipment designed
to meet hearing impaired people's needs; and is fluent in American sign
language.

"Qualified
contractor" shall have staff bilingual in American sign language and
standard English available for quality language/cultural interpretations;
quality training of operators; and policies, training, and operational
procedures to be determined by the office.

"The
department" means the department of social and health services of the
state of Washington.))

(3)
"Department" means the department of social and health services.

(4)
"Office" means the office of deaf ((services)) and hard of
hearing within the state department of social and health services.

Sec. 2. RCW 43.20A.725 and 1998
c 245 s 59 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) The department,
through the sole authority of the office or its successor organization,
shall maintain a program whereby ((TTs, signal devices, and amplifying
accessories capable of serving the needs of the hearing and speech impaired
shall be provided under the standards established in subsection (10) of this
section to)) an individual of school age or older((:

(a) Who is certified
as hearing impaired by a licensed physician, audiologist, or a qualified state
agency, and to any subscriber that is an organization representing the hearing
impaired, as determined and specified by the TRS program advisory committee; or

(b) Who is certified
as speech impaired by a licensed physician, speech pathologist, or a qualified
state agency, and to any subscriber that is an organization representing the
speech impaired, as determined and specified by the TRS program advisory
committee.

For the purpose of
this section, certification implies that individuals cannot use the telephone
for expressive or receptive communications due to hearing or speech impairment.

(2) The office shall
award contracts on a competitive basis, to qualified persons for which
eligibility to contract is determined by the office, for the distribution and
maintenance of such TTs, signal devices, and amplifying accessories as shall be
determined by the office. When awarding such contracts, the office may
consider the quality of equipment and, with the director's approval, may award
contracts on a basis other than cost. Such contracts may include a provision
for the employment and use of a qualified trainer and the training of
recipients in the use of such devices.

(3) The office shall
establish and implement a policy for the ultimate responsibility for recovery
of TTs, signal devices, and amplifying accessories from recipients who have
been provided with the equipment without cost and who are moving from this
state or who for other reasons are no longer using them.

(4) Pursuant to
recommendations of the TRS program advisory committee, until July 26, 1993, the
office shall maintain a program whereby a relay system will be provided
state-wide using operator intervention to connect hearing impaired and speech
impaired persons and offices or organizations representing the hearing impaired
and speech impaired, as determined and specified by the TDD advisory committee
pursuant to RCW 43.20A.730. The relay system shall be the most cost-effective
possible and shall operate in a manner consistent with federal requirements for
such systems.

(5) Pursuant to the
recommendations of the TDD task force report of December 1991, and with the
express purpose of maintaining state control and jurisdiction, the office shall
seek certification by the federal communications commission of the state-wide
relay service.

(6) The office shall
award contracts for the operation and maintenance of the state-wide relay
service. The initial contract shall be for service commencing on or before
July 26, 1993.)) who
possesses a hearing or speech impairment is provided with telecommunications
equipment, software, and/or peripheral devices, digital or otherwise, that is
determined by the office to be necessary for such a person to access and use
telecommunications transmission services effectively.

(2) The department,
through the sole authority of the office or its successor organization, shall
maintain a program where telecommunications relay services of a human or
electronic nature will be provided to connect hearing impaired, deaf-blind, or
speech impaired persons with persons who do not have a hearing or speech
impairment. Such telecommunications relay services shall provide the ability
for an individual who has a hearing or speech impairment to engage in voice,
tactile, or visual communication by wire or radio with a hearing individual in
a manner that is functionally equivalent to the ability of an individual who
does not have a hearing or speech impairment to communicate using voice or
visual communication services by wire or radio subject to subsection (4)(b) of
this section.

(3) The
telecommunications relay service and equipment distribution program may operate
in such a manner as to provide communications transmission opportunities that
are capable of incorporating new technologies that have demonstrated benefits
consistent with the intent of this chapter and are in the best interests of the
citizens of this state.

(4) The office shall
administer and control the award of money to all parties incurring costs in
implementing and maintaining telecommunications services, programs, equipment,
and technical support services according to this section. The relay
service contract shall be awarded to an individual company registered as a
telecommunications company by the utilities and transportation commission, to a
group of registered telecommunications companies, or to any other company or
organization determined by the office as qualified to provide relay services,
contingent upon that company or organization being approved as a registered
telecommunications company prior to final contract approval. The relay
system providers and telecommunications equipment vendors shall be selected on
the basis of cost-effectiveness and utility to the greatest extent possible
under the program and technical specifications established by the office.

(a) To the extent
funds are available under the then-current rate and not otherwise held in
reserve or required for other purposes authorized by this chapter, the office
may award contracts for communications and related services and equipment for
hearing impaired or speech impaired individuals accessing or receiving services
provided by, or contracted for, the department to meet access obligations under
Title 2 of the federal Americans with disabilities act or related federal
regulations.

(b) The office shall
perform its duties under this section with the goal of achieving functional
equivalency of access to and use of telecommunications services similar to the
enjoyment of access to and use of such services experienced by an individual
who does not have a hearing or speech impairment only to the extent that funds
are available under the then-current rate and not otherwise held in reserve or
required for other purposes authorized by this chapter.

(((7))) (5)
The program shall be funded by a telecommunications relay service (TRS) excise
tax applied to each switched access line provided by the local exchange
companies. The office shall determine, in consultation with the ((TRS))
office's program advisory committee, the budget needed to fund the
program on an annual basis, including both operational costs and a reasonable
amount for capital improvements such as equipment upgrade and replacement. The
budget proposed by the office, together with documentation and supporting
materials, shall be submitted to the office of financial management for review
and approval. The approved budget shall be given by the department in an
annual budget to the utilities and transportation commission no later than
March 1 prior to the beginning of the fiscal year. The utilities and
transportation commission shall then determine the amount of ((TRS)) telecommunications
relay service excise tax to be placed on each access line and shall inform
each local exchange company of this amount no later than May 15. The utilities
and transportation commission shall determine the amount of ((TRS)) telecommunications
relay service excise tax by dividing the total of the program budget, as
submitted by the office, by the total number of access lines, and shall not
exercise any further oversight of the program under this subsection. The ((TRS))
telecommunications relay service excise tax shall not exceed nineteen
cents per month per access line. Each local exchange company shall impose the
amount of excise tax determined by the commission as of July 1, and shall remit
the amount collected directly to the department on a monthly basis. The ((TRS))
telecommunications relay service excise tax shall be separately
identified on each ratepayer's bill with the following statement: "Funds
federal ADA requirement." All proceeds from the ((TRS)) telecommunications
relay service excise tax shall be put into a fund to be administered by the
office through the department.

(((8) The office
shall administer and control the award of money to all parties incurring costs
in implementing and maintaining telecommunications services, programs,
equipment, and technical support services in accordance with the provisions of
RCW 43.20A.725.

(9) The program
shall be)) (6) The
telecommunications relay service program and equipment vendors shall provide
services and equipment consistent with the requirements of federal law for
the operation of both interstate and intrastate telecommunications services for
the ((deaf or)) hearing impaired or speech impaired. The department and
the utilities and transportation commission shall be responsible for ensuring
compliance with federal requirements and shall provide timely notice to the
legislature of any legislation that may be required to accomplish compliance.

(((10)(a) The
department shall provide TTs, signal devices, and amplifying accessories to a
person eligible under subsection (1) of this section at no charge in addition
to the basic exchange rate if:

(i) The person is
eligible for participation in the Washington telephone assistance program under
RCW 80.36.470;

(ii) The person's
annual family income is equal to or less than one hundred sixty-five percent of
the federal poverty level; or

(iii) The person is
a child eighteen years of age or younger with a family income less than or
equal to two hundred percent of the federal poverty level.

(b) A person
eligible under subsection (1) of this section with a family income greater than
one hundred sixty-five percent and less than or equal to two hundred percent of
the federal poverty level shall be assessed a charge for the cost of TTs,
signal devices, and amplifying accessories based on a sliding scale of charges
established by rule adopted by the department.

(c) The department
shall charge a person eligible under subsection (1) of this section whose
income exceeds two hundred percent of the federal poverty level the cost to the
department of purchasing the equipment provided to that person.

(d) The department
may waive part or all of the charges assessed under this subsection if the
department finds that (i) the eligible person requires telebraille equipment or
other equipment of similar cost and (ii) the charges normally assessed for the
equipment under this subsection would create an exceptional or undue hardship
on the eligible person.

(e) For the purposes
of this subsection, certification of family income by the eligible person or
the person's guardian or head of household is sufficient to determine
eligibility.))

(7) The
department shall adopt rules establishing eligibility criteria, ownership
obligations, financial contributions, and a program for distribution to
individuals requesting and receiving such telecommunications devices
distributed by the office, and other rules necessary to administer programs and
services consistent with this chapter.

---
END ---