BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF
WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec.
1. The legislature finds
that:

(1) Many consumers in
this state appreciate and seek out the opportunity to purchase local farm
products.

(2) Consumers and
small-scale farmers would both benefit from increased opportunities to market
farm products locally. Direct marketing provides farmers with the opportunity
to realize an increased share of consumers' food dollars and provides consumers
with a greater opportunity to support local agriculture and understand farm
operations, farm culture, and the role farms play in meeting our food needs.

(3) The state would
greatly benefit from a focused effort to increase the economic viability and
profitability of small farms through increasing their ability to market their
products directly to consumers.

(4) Direct marketing
opportunities are often not feasible for farmers to undertake because of market
barriers and the difficulty of obtaining information related to marketing.

(5) A direct marketing
assistance program for small farmers could provide the needed information,
technical assistance, and barrier clearing work that is a key to increasing
direct marketing of farm products.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
2. A new section is added
to chapter 15.64 RCW to read as follows:

(1) The small farm
direct marketing assistance program is created.

(2) The director shall
employ a small farm direct marketing assistant.

(3) The small farm
direct marketing assistance program shall assist small farms in their direct
marketing efforts. In carrying out this duty the program shall:

(a) Assist small farms
in complying with federal, state, and local rules and regulations as they apply
to direct marketing of agricultural products;

(b) Assist in
developing infrastructure to increase direct marketing opportunities for small
farms;

(c) Provide information
on direct marketing opportunities for small farms;

(d) Promote localized food
production systems;

(e) Increase access to
information for farmers wishing to sell farm products directly to consumers;

(f) Identify and help
reduce market barriers facing small farms in direct marketing;

(g) Assist in
developing and submitting proposals to grant programs to assist small farm
direct marketing efforts; and

(h) Perform other
functions that will assist small farms in directly marketing their products.

(4) This section
expires July 1, 2007.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
3. A new section is added
to chapter 15.64 RCW to read as follows:

(1) The director shall,
by December 1, 2006, issue a report on the accomplishments of the small farm
direct marketing assistance program. The report must be submitted to the
committees of the senate and the house of representatives that have
jurisdiction over agricultural issues. The report must be made available to
the public.

(2) This
section expires July 1, 2007.

---
END ---