BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF
WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec.
1. A new section is added
to chapter 82.08 RCW to read as follows:

(1) The tax levied by
RCW 82.08.020 does not apply to sales to farmers or to veterinarians of animal
pharmaceuticals approved by the United States department of agriculture or by
the United States food and drug administration, if the pharmaceutical is to be
administered to an animal that is raised by a farmer for the purpose of
producing for sale an agricultural product.

(2) The exemption is
available only when the buyer provides the seller with an exemption certificate
in a form and manner prescribed by the department. The seller must retain a
copy of the certificate for the seller's files.

(3) For the purposes of
this section and section 2 of this act, the following definitions apply:

(a) "Farmer"
and "agricultural product" mean the same as in RCW 82.04.213.

(b)
"Veterinarian" means a person who is licensed to practice veterinary
medicine, surgery, or dentistry under chapter 18.92 RCW.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
2. A new section is added
to chapter 82.12 RCW to read as follows:

(1) The provisions of
this chapter do not apply with respect to the use by farmers or by
veterinarians of animal pharmaceuticals approved by the United States
department of agriculture or by the United States food and drug administration,
if the pharmaceutical is administered to an animal that is raised by a farmer
for the purpose of producing for sale an agricultural product.

(2) The definitions in
section 1 of this act apply to this section.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 3. This act is necessary for
the immediate preservation of the public peace, health, or safety, or support
of the state government and its existing public institutions, and takes effect
August 1, 2001.

---
END ---