BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF
WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec.
1. A new section is added
to chapter 82.08 RCW to read as follows:

(1) The tax levied by
RCW 82.08.020 does not apply to sales to farmers of propane or natural gas used
to heat structures used to house chickens. The propane or natural gas must be
used exclusively to heat the structures. The structures must be used exclusively
to house chickens that are sold as agricultural products.

(2) The exemption is
available only when the buyer provides the seller with an exemption certificate
in a form and manner prescribed by the department. The seller must retain a
copy of the certificate for the seller's files.

(3) The definitions in
this subsection apply to this section and section 2 of this act.

(a)
"Structures" means barns, sheds, and other similar buildings in which
chickens are housed.

(b) "Farmer"
has the same meaning as provided in RCW 82.04.213.

(c) "Agricultural
product" has the same meaning as provided in RCW 82.04.213.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
2. A new section is added
to chapter 82.12 RCW to read as follows:

(1) The provisions of
this chapter do not apply with respect to the use by a farmer of propane or
natural gas to heat structures used to house chickens. The propane or natural
gas must be used exclusively to heat the structures used to house chickens.
The structures must be used exclusively to house chickens that are sold as
agricultural products.

(2) The exemption
certificate, recordkeeping requirements, and definitions of section 1 of this
act apply to this section.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
3. A new section is added
to chapter 82.08 RCW to read as follows:

(1) The tax levied by
RCW 82.08.020 does not apply to sales to a farmer of bedding materials used to
accumulate and facilitate the removal of chicken manure. The farmer must be
raising chickens that are sold as agricultural products.

(2) The exemption is
available only when the buyer provides the seller with an exemption certificate
in a form and manner prescribed by the department. The seller must retain a
copy of the certificate for the seller's files.

(3) The definitions in
this subsection apply to this section and section 4 of this act.

(a) "Bedding
materials" means wood shavings, straw, sawdust, shredded paper and other
similar materials.

(b) "Farmer"
has the same meaning as provided in RCW 82.04.213.

(c) "Agricultural
product" has the same meaning as provided in RCW 82.04.213.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
4. A new section is added
to chapter 82.12 RCW to read as follows:

(1) The provisions of
this chapter do not apply with respect to the use by a farmer of bedding
materials used to accumulate and facilitate the removal of chicken manure. The
farmer must be raising chickens that are sold as agricultural products.

(2) The
exemption certificate, recordkeeping requirements, and definitions of section 3
of this act apply to this section.

---
END ---