BE IT ENACTED
BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1. It is the intent of the
legislature to provide tax exemptions and credits to assist dairy farmers to
comply with the dairy nutrient management act, chapter 90.64 RCW, and to assist
public or private entities to establish and operate anaerobic digesters to
treat dairy nutrients on a regional or on‑farm basis.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2. A new section is added
to chapter 82.08 RCW to read as follows:

(1) The tax levied by RCW 82.08.020 does not apply to sales to
eligible persons of services rendered in respect to operating, repairing,
cleaning, altering, or improving of dairy nutrient management equipment and
facilities, or to sales of tangible personal property that becomes an
ingredient or component of the equipment and facilities. The equipment and
facilities must be used exclusively for activities necessary to implement a
dairy nutrient management plan as required under chapter 90.64 RCW. This exemption
applies to sales made after the dairy nutrient management plan is certified
under chapter 90.64 RCW.

(2)(a) The department of revenue must provide an exemption
certificate to an eligible person upon application by that person. The
department of agriculture must provide a list of eligible persons to the
department of revenue. The application must be in a form and manner prescribed
by the department and must contain information regarding the location of the
dairy and other information the department may require.

(b) The exemption is available only when the buyer provides the
seller with an exemption certificate in a form and manner prescribed by the
department. The seller must retain a copy of the certificate for the seller's
files.

(3) The definitions in this subsection apply to this section and
section 3 of this act unless the context clearly requires otherwise:

(a) "Dairy nutrient management equipment and facilities"
means machinery, equipment, and structures used in the handling and treatment of
dairy manure, such as aerators, agitators, alley scrapers, augers, dams, gutter
cleaners, loaders, lagoons, pipes, pumps, separators, and tanks. The term also
includes tangible personal property that becomes an ingredient or component of
the equipment and facilities, including repair and replacement parts.

(b) "Eligible person" means a person licensed to produce
milk under chapter 15.36 RCW who has a certified dairy nutrient management plan
by December 31, 2003, as required by chapter 90.64 RCW.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3. A new section is added
to chapter 82.12 RCW to read as follows:

The provisions of this chapter do not apply with respect to the use
by an eligible person of tangible personal property that becomes an ingredient
or component of dairy nutrient management equipment and facilities, as defined
in section 2 of this act. The equipment and facilities must be used
exclusively for activities necessary to implement a dairy management plan as
required under chapter 90.64 RCW. This exemption applies to the use of
tangible personal property made after the dairy nutrient management plan is
certified under chapter 90.64 RCW. The exemption certificate and recordkeeping
requirements of section 2 of this act apply to this section.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 4. A new section is added
to chapter 82.08 RCW to read as follows:

(1) The tax levied by RCW 82.08.020 does not apply to sales to an
eligible person establishing or operating an anaerobic digester or to services
rendered in respect to installing, constructing, repairing, cleaning, altering,
or improving an anaerobic digester, or to sales of tangible personal property
that becomes an ingredient or component of the anaerobic digester. The
anaerobic digester must be used primarily to treat dairy manure.

(2)(a) The department of revenue must provide an exemption
certificate to an eligible person upon application by that person. The
application must be in a form and manner prescribed by the department and must
contain information regarding the location of the facility and other
information as the department may require.

(b) The exemption is available only when the buyer provides the
seller with an exemption certificate in a form and manner prescribed by the
department. The seller must retain a copy of the certificate for the seller's
files.

(3) The definitions in this subsection apply to this section and
section 5 of this act unless the context clearly requires otherwise:

(a) "Anaerobic digester" means a facility that processes
manure from cattle into biogas and dried manure using microorganisms in a
decomposition process within a closed, oxygen-free container.

(b) "Eligible person" means any person establishing or
operating an anaerobic digester to treat primarily dairy manure.

(c) "Primarily" means more than fifty percent measured by
volume or weight.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5. A new section is added
to chapter 82.12 RCW to read as follows:

The provisions of this chapter do not apply with respect to the use
of anaerobic digesters or tangible personal property that becomes an ingredient
or component of anaerobic digesters to treat primarily dairy manure by an
eligible person establishing or operating an anaerobic digester, as defined in
section 4 of this act.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 6. A new section is added
to chapter 82.04 RCW to read as follows:

(1) A person who is eligible for and takes the exemption under
section 4 or 5 of this act may take a credit against tax imposed by this
chapter, subject to the limitations in this section.

(2) The credit under this section is equal to fifty percent of the
amount of money expended for constructing facilities or acquiring tangible
personal property for which an exemption was taken under section 4 or 5 of this
act.

(3) No application is necessary for the credit under this section.
A person taking the credit must keep records necessary for the department to
verify eligibility under this section. Tax credit may not be claimed for
expenditures that occurred before the effective date of this section.

(4) No applicant is eligible for tax credits under this section in
excess of the amount of tax that would otherwise be due under this chapter.
The credit must be claimed by the due date of the last tax return for the
calendar year in which the payment is made. Any unused credit expires.
Refunds shall not be given in place of credits.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 7. A new section is added
to chapter 84.36 RCW to read as follows:

(1) All real and personal property meeting the definition of dairy
nutrient management equipment and facilities that is owned by an eligible
person, as these terms are defined in section 2 of this act, and exclusively
used in the implementation of an approved dairy nutrient management plan, as
required under chapter 90.64 RCW, is exempt from property taxation for not more
than six assessment years after a claim for the exemption is approved in
accordance with subsection (3) of this section. To qualify for this exemption,
the property must be acquired and/or construction or installation be completed
prior to December 31, 2003.

(2) All real and personal property meeting the definition of anaerobic
digester that is owned by an eligible person, as these terms are defined in
section 4 of this act and primarily used for the treatment of manure from dairy
cattle is exempt from property taxation for the six assessment years after it
is acquired, constructed, or installed.

(3) A claim for exemption under this section must be filed annually
with the county assessor on or before the first day of November for exemption
from taxes levied for collection in the following year. The claim must be
submitted on forms prescribed by the department of revenue and developed in
consultation with the department of agriculture and the conservation
commission. The claimant must certify each year that the property for which
exemption is sought meets the definition of dairy nutrient management equipment
and facilities and is exclusively used in the implementation of an approved
dairy nutrient management plan as required under chapter 90.64 RCW.
Alternatively, the claimant must certify each year that the property for which
exemption is sought meets the definition of anaerobic digester and is primarily
used for the treatment of manure from dairy cattle.

(4) If at any time during the six-year exemption period the
property no longer qualifies for the exemption as granted in subsection (1) or
(2) of this section, the property loses its exempt status.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 8. This act is necessary for
the immediate preservation of the public peace, health, or safety, or support
of the state government and its existing public institutions, and takes effect
immediately.

--- END ---