BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF
WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1. RCW 10.73.170 and 2000 c
92 s 1 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) On or before
December 31, ((2002)) 2004, a person in this state who has been
((sentenced to death or life imprisonment without possibility of release or
parole)) convicted of a felony and is currently serving a term of
imprisonment and who has been denied postconviction DNA testing may submit
a request to the county prosecutor in the county where the conviction was
obtained for postconviction DNA testing, if DNA evidence was not admitted
because the court ruled DNA testing did not meet acceptable scientific
standards or DNA testing technology was not sufficiently developed to test the
DNA evidence in the case. On and after January 1, ((2003)) 2005,
a person must raise the DNA issues at trial or on appeal.

(2) The prosecutor
shall screen the request. The request shall be reviewed based upon the
likelihood that the DNA evidence would demonstrate innocence on a more probable
than not basis. Upon determining that testing should occur and the evidence
still exists, the prosecutor shall request DNA testing by the Washington state
patrol crime laboratory. Contact with victims shall be handled through
victim/witness divisions.

(3) A person denied a
request made pursuant to subsections (1) and (2) of this section has a right to
appeal his or her request within thirty days of denial of the request by the
prosecutor. The appeal shall be to the ((attorney general's office)) trial
court that entered the judgment of conviction in his or her case. If the
((attorney general's office)) court determines that it is likely
that the DNA testing would demonstrate innocence on a more probable than not
basis, then the ((attorney general's office)) court shall ((request))
order DNA testing by the Washington state patrol crime laboratory.

(4) The decision of
the trial court granting or denying a motion for DNA testing under this section
is not appealable, and is subject to review only through petition for writ of
mandate or prohibition filed by the person seeking DNA testing, the prosecuting
attorney, or the attorney general. Any such petition must be filed within
twenty days after the court's order granting or denying the motion for DNA
testing. In a noncapital case, the petition for writ of mandate or prohibition
is filed in the court of appeals. In a capital case, the petition is filed in
the supreme court. The court of appeals or supreme court must expedite its
review of a petition for writ of mandate or prohibition filed under this
section.

(5)
Notwithstanding any other provision of law, any biological material that has
been secured in connection with a criminal case prior to the effective date of
this act may not be destroyed before January 1, 2005.

--- END ---