BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF
WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec.
1. The legislature finds and
declares:

(1) Public school
educators and administrators should be afforded greater decision-making
authority over licensing and standards of practice, responsibilities long held
by members of other professions including law, medicine, nursing, engineering,
and real estate;

(2) Creation of a
public, rule-making body whose sole focus is educator preparation, licensure,
assessment, and standards of practice would be likely to bring greater focus
and attention to the profession;

(3) Professional
educator standards boards are consumer protection boards, establishing policies
to ensure the public that its practitioners are competent;

(4) The highest
possible standards for all educators are essential in ensuring attainment of
high academic standards by all students; and

(5) Granting educators
the authority to determine standards for entry to or continuation in the
profession of education could become an important form of acknowledgment of the
value of teachers and administrators and would represent the high level of
trust, as professionals, that teachers and administrators have earned and to
which they are entitled.

Sec. 2. RCW 28A.410.200 and 2000
c 39 s 102 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) The Washington
professional educator standards board is created, consisting of nineteen
members to be appointed by the governor to four-year terms and the
superintendent of public instruction, who shall be an ex officio, nonvoting
member. No person may serve as a member of the board for more than two
consecutive full terms. Terms of the initial board members shall be
staggered. Of the initial members, eight shall serve four-year terms, seven
shall serve three-year terms, and four shall serve two-year terms. The
governor shall annually appoint the chair of the board from among the teachers
and principals on the board. No board member may serve as chair for more than
two consecutive years.

(2) Seven of the
members shall be public school teachers, one shall be a private school teacher,
three shall represent higher education educator preparation programs, four
shall be school administrators, two shall be educational staff associates, one
shall be a parent, and one shall be a member of the public.

(3) Public school
teachers appointed to the board must:

(a) Have at least three
years of teaching experience in a Washington public school;

(b) Be currently
certificated and actively employed in a teaching position; and

(c) Include one teacher
currently teaching at the elementary school level, one at the middle school
level, one at the high school level, and one vocationally certificated.

(4) Private school
teachers appointed to the board must:

(a) Have at least three
years of teaching experience in a Washington approved private school; and

(b) Be currently
certificated and actively employed in a teaching position in an approved
private school.

(5) Appointees from
higher education educator preparation programs must include two representatives
from institutions of higher education as defined in RCW 28B.10.016 and one
representative from an institution of higher education as defined in RCW
28B.07.020(4).

(6) School
administrators appointed to the board must:

(a) Have at least three
years of administrative experience in a Washington public school district;

(b) Be currently
certificated and actively employed in a school administrator position; and

(c) Include two public
school principals, one Washington approved private school principal, and one
superintendent.

(7) Educational staff
associates appointed to the board must:

(a) Have at least three
years of educational staff associate experience in a Washington public school
district; and

(b) Be currently
certificated and actively employed in an educational staff associate position.

(8) Each major caucus
of the house of representatives and the senate shall submit a list of at least
one public school teacher. In making the public school teacher appointments,
the governor shall select one nominee from each list provided by each caucus.
The governor shall appoint the remaining members of the board from a list of
qualified nominees submitted to the governor by organizations representative of
the constituencies of the board, from applications from other qualified individuals,
or from both nominees and applicants.

(9) All appointments to
the board made by the governor shall be subject to confirmation by the senate.

(10) The governor shall
appoint the members of the initial board no later than June 1, 2000.

(11) In appointing
board members, the governor shall consider the diversity of the population of
the state.

(12) Each member of the
board shall be compensated in accordance with RCW 43.03.240 and shall be
reimbursed for travel expenses incurred in carrying out the duties of the board
in accordance with RCW 43.03.050 and 43.03.060.

(13) The governor may
remove a member of the board for neglect of duty, misconduct, malfeasance or
misfeasance in office, or for incompetency or unprofessional conduct as defined
in chapter 18.130 RCW. In such a case, the governor shall file with the
secretary of state a statement of the causes for and the order of removal from
office, and the secretary of state shall send a certified copy of the statement
of causes and order of removal to the last known post office address of the
member.

(14) If a vacancy
occurs on the board, the governor shall appoint a replacement member from the
nominees as specified in subsection (8) of this section to fill the remainder
of the unexpired term. When filling a vacancy of a member nominated by a major
caucus of the legislature, the governor shall select the new member from a list
of at least one name submitted by the same caucus that provided the list from
which the retiring member was appointed.

(15) Members of the
board shall hire an executive director and an administrative assistant to
reside in the office of the superintendent of public instruction for
administrative purposes only.

Sec. 3. RCW 28A.410.210 and 2000
c 39 s 103 are each amended to read as follows:

The Washington
professional educator standards board shall:

(1) Serve as an
advisory body to the superintendent of public instruction ((and as the sole
advisory body to the state board of education on issues related to educator
recruitment, hiring, preparation, certification including high quality
alternative routes to certification, mentoring and support, professional
growth, retention, governance, prospective teacher pedagogy assessment,
prospective principal assessment, educator evaluation including but not limited
to peer evaluation, and revocation and suspension of licensure)) on
issues related to educators for which the superintendent of public instruction
has rule-making authority;

(2) Submit annual
reports and recommendations, beginning December 1, 2000, to the governor, the
education and fiscal committees of the legislature, ((the state board of
education,)) and the superintendent of public instruction concerning duties
and activities within the board's ((advisory)) capacity((. The
Washington professional educator standards board shall submit a separate report
by December 1, 2000, to the governor, the education and fiscal committees of
the legislature, the state board of education, and the superintendent of public
instruction providing recommendations for at least two high quality alternative
routes to teacher certification. In its deliberations, the board shall
consider at least one route that permits persons with substantial subject
matter expertise to achieve residency certification through an on-the-job
training program provided by a school district)); ((and))

(3) Establish the
prospective teacher assessment system for basic skills and subject knowledge
that shall be required to obtain residency certification pursuant to RCW
28A.410.220 through 28A.410.240;

(4) Approve or
disapprove the program of courses leading to teacher, school administrator, and
school specialized personnel certification offered by all institutions of
higher education in Washington state that may be accredited and whose graduates
may become entitled to receive such certification;

(5) Every five years
beginning in 2004, conduct a review of the program approval standards,
including the minimum standards for teachers, administrators, and educational
staff associates, to reflect research findings and assure continued improvement
of preparation programs for teachers, administrators, and educational staff
associates;

(6) Investigate the
character of the work required to be performed as a condition of entrance to
and graduation from any institution of higher education as defined in RCW
28B.10.016 relative to such certification as provided for in subsection (4) of
this section, and prepare a list of accredited institutions of higher education
of this and other states whose graduates may be awarded such certificates;

(7)(a) Adopt rules
to allow a teacher certification candidate to fulfill, in part, teacher
preparation program requirements through work experience as a classified
teacher's aide in a public school or private school meeting the requirements of
RCW 28A.195.010. The rules shall include, but are not limited to, limitations
based upon the recency of the teacher preparation candidate's teacher aide work
experience, and limitations based on the amount of work experience that may
apply toward teacher preparation program requirements under this chapter;

(b) Require that at
the time of the individual's enrollment in a teacher preparation program, the
supervising teacher and the building principal shall jointly provide to the
teacher preparation program of the institution of higher education at which the
teacher candidate is enrolled, a written assessment of the performance of the
teacher candidate. The assessment shall contain such information as determined
by the Washington professional educator standards board and shall include:
Evidence that at least fifty percent of the candidate's work as a classified
teacher's aide was involved in instructional activities with children under the
supervision of a certificated teacher and that the candidate worked a minimum
of six hundred thirty hours for one school year; the type of work performed by
the candidate; and a recommendation of whether the candidate's work experience
as a classified teacher's aide should be substituted for teacher preparation
program requirements. In compliance with such rules as may be established
under this section, the teacher preparation programs of the institution of
higher education where the candidate is enrolled shall make the final
determination as to what teacher preparation program requirements may be
fulfilled by teacher aide work experience;

(8) Supervise the
issuance of such certificates as provided for in subsection (4) of this section
and specify the types and kinds of certificates necessary for the several
departments of the common schools by rule in accordance with RCW 28A.410.010;

(9) Apply for and
receive federal or other funds on behalf of the state for purposes related to
the duties of the board; and

(10) Adopt any rules
necessary to implement this chapter. Any rules adopted by the board pertaining
directly to the preparation, assessment, certification, and standards of
practice of administrators shall require the approval of the majority of administrators
on the board.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
4. (1) All powers, duties,
and functions of the state board of education pertaining to establishing and
maintaining standards and processes for approving college, university, and
school district programs for the preparation of educators and administrators, and
educator and administrator assessment, certification, and standards of practice
are transferred to the Washington professional educator standards board. All
references to the state board of education in the Revised Code of Washington
shall be construed to mean the Washington professional educator standards board
when referring to the functions transferred in this section.

(2)(a) All reports,
documents, surveys, books, records, files, papers, or written material in the
possession of the state board of education pertaining to the powers, functions,
and duties transferred shall be delivered to the custody of the Washington
professional educator standards board.

(b) Whenever any
question arises as to the transfer of any funds, books, documents, records, papers,
files, equipment, or other tangible property used or held in the exercise of
the powers and the performance of the duties and functions transferred, the
director of financial management shall make a determination as to the proper
allocation and certify the same to the state agencies concerned.

(3) All rules and all
pending business before the state board of education pertaining to the powers,
functions, and duties transferred shall be continued and acted upon by the
Washington professional educator standards board. All existing contracts and
obligations shall remain in full force and shall be performed by the Washington
professional educator standards board.

(4) The transfer of the
powers, duties, and functions of the state board of education shall not affect
the validity of any act performed before the effective date of this section.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
5. In the 2001 budget for
the 2001-2003 biennium, the budget for the state board of education shall be
adjusted by an appropriate amount that reflects the reduction in its duties as
a result of sections 3 and 4 of this act.

Sec. 6. RCW 28A.410.010 and 1992
c 159 s 3 and 1992 c 60 s 2 are each reenacted and amended to read as follows:

The ((state board of
education)) Washington professional educator standards board shall
establish, publish, and enforce rules ((and regulations)) determining
eligibility for and certification of personnel employed in the common schools
of this state, including certification for emergency or temporary, substitute
or provisional duty and under such certificates or permits as the board shall
deem proper or as otherwise prescribed by law. The rules shall require that
the initial application for certification shall require a record check of the
applicant through the Washington state patrol criminal identification system
and through the federal bureau of investigation at the applicant's expense.
The record check shall include a fingerprint check using a complete Washington
state criminal identification fingerprint card. The superintendent of public
instruction may waive the record check for any applicant who has had a record
check within the two years before application.

In establishing rules
pertaining to the qualifications of instructors of American sign language the
((state)) board shall consult with the national association of the deaf,
"sign instructors guidance network" (s.i.g.n.), and the Washington
state association of the deaf for evaluation and certification of sign language
instructors.

The superintendent of
public instruction shall act as the administrator of any such rules ((and
regulations)) and have the power to issue any certificates or permits and
revoke the same in accordance with board rules ((and regulations)).

Sec. 7. RCW 28A.410.020 and 1996
c 309 s 1 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) No person may be
admitted to a professional teacher preparation program within Washington state
without first demonstrating by one of the following options that he or she is
competent in the basic skills required for oral and written communication,
reading, and computation:

(a) Successful
completion of an examination in the basic skills required for oral and written
communication, reading, and computation; or

(b) Completion of a
baccalaureate degree program; or

(c) Completion of a
graduate degree program; or

(d) Completion of two
or more years of college level course work and demonstrated basic skills
competency through college level course work and a written essay; or

(e) Earning a combined
score of more than the state-wide median score for the prior school year scored
by all persons taking tests of general achievement selected by the ((state
board of education)) Washington professional educator standards board.

(2) The ((state
board of education)) Washington professional educator standards board
shall adopt rules to implement this section.

(3) This section
expires September 1, 2002.

Sec. 8. RCW 28A.410.040 and 1992
c 141 s 101 are each amended to read as follows:

The ((state board
of education)) Washington professional educator standards board
shall adopt rules providing that, except as provided in this section, all
individuals qualifying for an initial-level teaching certificate ((after
August 31, 1992,)) shall possess a baccalaureate degree in the arts,
sciences, and/or humanities and have fulfilled the requirements for teacher
certification pursuant to RCW 28A.305.130 (1) and (2). However, candidates for
grades preschool through eight certificates shall have fulfilled the
requirements for a major as part of their baccalaureate degree. If the major
is in early childhood education, elementary education, or special education,
the candidate must have at least thirty quarter hours or twenty semester hours
in one academic field.

Sec. 9. RCW 28A.410.050 and 1992
c 141 s 102 are each amended to read as follows:

The ((state board
of education)) Washington professional educator standards board
shall develop and adopt rules establishing baccalaureate and masters degree
equivalency standards for vocational instructors performing instructional
duties and acquiring certification ((after August 31, 1992)).

Sec. 10. RCW 28A.410.060 and 1990
c 33 s 407 are each amended to read as follows:

The fee for any
certificate, or any renewal thereof, issued by the authority of the state of
Washington, and authorizing the holder to teach or perform other professional
duties in the public schools of the state shall be not less than one dollar or
such reasonable fee therefor as the ((state board of education)) Washington
professional educator standards board by rule ((or regulation))
shall deem necessary therefor. The fee must accompany the application and
cannot be refunded unless the application is withdrawn before it is finally
considered. The educational service district superintendent, or other official
authorized to receive such fee, shall within thirty days transmit the same to
the treasurer of the county in which the office of the educational service
district superintendent is located, to be by him or her placed to the credit of
said school district or educational service district: PROVIDED, That if any
school district collecting fees for the certification of professional staff
does not hold a professional training institute separate from the educational
service district then all such moneys shall be placed to the credit of the
educational service district.

Such fees shall be used
solely for the purpose of precertification professional preparation, program
evaluation, and professional in-service training programs in accord with rules
((and regulations)) of the ((state board of education herein)) Washington
professional educator standards board authorized under this chapter.

Sec. 11. RCW 28A.410.100 and 1992
c 159 s 6 are each amended to read as follows:

Any teacher whose
certificate to teach has been questioned under RCW 28A.410.090 shall have a
right to be heard by the issuing authority before his or her certificate is
revoked. Any teacher whose certificate to teach has been revoked shall have a
right of appeal to the ((state board of education)) Washington
professional educator standards board if notice of appeal is given by
written affidavit to the board within thirty days after the certificate is
revoked.

An appeal
to the ((state board of education)) Washington professional educator
standards board within the time specified shall operate as a stay of
revocation proceedings until the next regular or special meeting of ((said))
the board and until the board's decision has been rendered.

Sec. 12. RCW 28A.410.120 and 1990
c 33 s 411 are each amended to read as follows:

Notwithstanding any
other provision of this title, the ((state board of education)) Washington
professional educator standards board or superintendent of public
instruction shall not require any professional certification or other
qualifications of any person elected superintendent of a local school district
by that district's board of directors, or any person hired in any manner to
fill a position designated as, or which is, in fact, deputy superintendent, or
assistant superintendent.

Sec. 13. RCW 28A.305.130 and 1997
c 13 s 5 are each amended to read as follows:

In addition to any
other powers and duties as provided by law, effective July 1, 2000, the
state board of education shall:

(1) ((Approve or
disapprove the program of courses leading to teacher, school administrator, and
school specialized personnel certification offered by all institutions of
higher education within the state which may be accredited and whose graduates
may become entitled to receive such certification.

(2) Conduct every
five years a review of the program approval standards, including the minimum
standards for teachers, administrators, and educational staff associates, to
reflect research findings and assure continued improvement of preparation
programs for teachers, administrators, and educational staff associates.

(3) Investigate the
character of the work required to be performed as a condition of entrance to
and graduation from any institution of higher education in this state relative
to such certification as provided for in subsection (1) above, and prepare a
list of accredited institutions of higher education of this and other states
whose graduates may be awarded such certificates.

(4)(a) The state
board of education shall adopt rules to allow a teacher certification candidate
to fulfill, in part, teacher preparation program requirements through work
experience as a classified teacher's aide in a public school or private school
meeting the requirements of RCW 28A.195.010. The rules shall include, but are
not limited to, limitations based upon the recency of the teacher preparation candidate's
teacher aide work experience, and limitations based on the amount of work
experience that may apply toward teacher preparation program requirements under
this chapter.

(b) The state board
of education shall require that at the time of the individual's enrollment in a
teacher preparation program, the supervising teacher and the building principal
shall jointly provide to the teacher preparation program of the higher
education institution at which the teacher candidate is enrolled, a written
assessment of the performance of the teacher candidate. The assessment shall
contain such information as determined by the state board of education and
shall include: Evidence that at least fifty percent of the candidate's work as
a classified teacher's aide was involved in instructional activities with
children under the supervision of a certificated teacher and that the candidate
worked a minimum of six hundred thirty hours for one school year; the type of
work performed by the candidate; and a recommendation of whether the
candidate's work experience as a classified teacher's aide should be
substituted for teacher preparation program requirements. In compliance with
such rules as may be established by the state board of education under this
section, the teacher preparation programs of the higher education institution
where the candidate is enrolled shall make the final determination as to what
teacher preparation program requirements may be fulfilled by teacher aide work
experience.

(5) Supervise the
issuance of such certificates as provided for in subsection (1) above and
specify the types and kinds of certificates necessary for the several
departments of the common schools by rule or regulation in accordance with RCW
28A.410.010.

(6))) Accredit, subject to such accreditation
standards and procedures as may be established by the state board of education,
all schools that apply for accreditation, and approve, subject to the
provisions of RCW 28A.195.010, private schools carrying out a program for any
or all of the grades kindergarten through twelve: PROVIDED, That no private
school may be approved that operates a kindergarten program only: PROVIDED
FURTHER, That no public or private schools shall be placed upon the list of
accredited schools so long as secret societies are knowingly allowed to exist
among its students by school officials: PROVIDED FURTHER, That the state board
may elect to require all or certain classifications of the public schools to
conduct and participate in such preaccreditation examination and evaluation
processes as may now or hereafter be established by the board.

(((7))) (2)
Make rules ((and regulations)) governing the establishment in any
existing nonhigh school district of any secondary program or any new grades in
grades nine through twelve. Before any such program or any new grades are
established the district must obtain prior approval of the state board.

(((8))) (3)
Prepare such outline of study for the common schools as the board shall deem
necessary, and prescribe such rules for the general government of the common
schools, as shall seek to secure regularity of attendance, prevent truancy,
secure efficiency, and promote the true interest of the common schools.

(((9))) (4)
Continuously reevaluate courses and adopt and enforce ((regulations)) rules
within the common schools so as to meet the educational needs of students and
articulate with the institutions of higher education and unify the work of the
public school system.

(((10))) (5)
Carry out board powers and duties relating to the organization and
reorganization of school districts under ((RCW 28A.315.010 through
28A.315.680 and 28A.315.900)) this title.

(((11))) (6)
By rule ((or regulation promulgated)) adopted upon the advice of
the chief of the Washington state patrol, through the director of fire
protection, provide for instruction of pupils in the public and private schools
carrying out a K through 12 program, or any part thereof, so that in case of
sudden emergency they shall be able to leave their particular school building
in the shortest possible time or take such other steps as the particular
emergency demands, and without confusion or panic; such rules ((and
regulations)) shall be published and distributed to certificated personnel
throughout the state whose duties shall include a familiarization therewith as
well as the means of implementation thereof at their particular school.

(((12))) (7)
Hear and decide appeals as otherwise provided by law.

The state board of
education is given the authority to promulgate information and rules dealing
with the prevention of child abuse for purposes of curriculum use in the common
schools.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 14. This act is necessary for
the immediate preservation of the public peace, health, or safety, or support
of the state government and its existing public institutions, and takes effect
June 1, 2001.

---
END ---