BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF
WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec.
1. The legislature finds
that the growing and processing of food and agricultural products is the
dominant industry in Washington state and a major employer in rural
Washington. The legislature also finds that agriculture is a critical
component of Washington's international trade industry, accounting for billions
of dollars in exports every year.

The legislature further
finds that the export market for Washington's agricultural products has dropped
significantly in recent years and that such a drop has negatively impacted the
economy in Washington's agricultural regions. Therefore, it is the intent of
the legislature to enhance Washington's international trade of agricultural
products by increasing funding for the Washington state department of
agriculture's international marketing program in an effort to promote marketing
of Washington's products and to assist the agricultural industry in efforts to
reduce trade barriers that stand in the way of trade in new and emerging
markets.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
2. There is created a market
development and promotion matching fund program within the Washington state
department of agriculture. The purpose of the program is to allow the
department of agriculture and the agricultural industry to combine funds in
order to access markets that are growth sales areas for a certain sector of the
industry's product. The goal of the program is to expose buyers to
Washington's diverse agricultural products. The agriculture industry may bring
in buying missions, perform trade promotions in various markets, hire overseas
contractors, and perform other marketing functions that help it target the
correct buyer and market for its product.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
3. Trade barriers have
become an increasingly important issue in the agricultural arena. The world
trade organization highlighted the need for "a fair and level playing
field." In the Washington state department of agriculture's experience,
both large and small commodity groups need money to address this issue. There
is created within the department of agriculture a trade barrier matching fund
program. The purpose of the program is to allow the department of agriculture
and the agricultural industry to combine funds in order to address trade
barrier issues impacting the agricultural industry.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
4. Sections 2 and 3 of this
act are each added to chapter 43.23 RCW.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 5. If specific funding for
the purposes of this act, referencing this act by bill or chapter number, is
not provided by June 30, 2001, in the omnibus appropriations act, this act is
null and void.

---
END ---