BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF
WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1. RCW 46.37.420 and 1999 c
208 s 1 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) It is unlawful to
operate a vehicle upon the public highways of this state unless it is
completely equipped with pneumatic rubber tires except vehicles equipped with
temporary-use spare tires that meet federal standards that are installed and
used in accordance with the manufacturer's instructions.

(2) No tire on a
vehicle moved on a highway may have on its periphery any block, flange, cleat,
or spike or any other protuberance of any material other than rubber which
projects beyond the tread of the traction surface of the tire, except that it
is permissible to use farm machinery equipped with pneumatic tires or solid
rubber tracks having protuberances that will not injure the highway, and except
also that it is permissible to use tire chains or metal studs imbedded within
the tire of reasonable proportions and of a type conforming to rules adopted by
the state patrol, upon any vehicle when required for safety because of snow,
ice, or other conditions tending to cause a vehicle to skid. For a vehicle
registered in a county east of the crest of the Cascade mountain range, it
is unlawful to use metal studs imbedded within the tire between April 1st and
November 1st. For a vehicle registered in a county west of the crest of the
Cascade mountain range, it is unlawful to use metal studs imbedded within the
tire between March 1st and December 1st. The state department of
transportation may, from time to time, determine additional periods in which
the use of tires with metal studs imbedded therein is lawful.

(3) The state
department of transportation and local authorities in their respective
jurisdictions may issue special permits authorizing the operation upon a
highway of traction engines or tractors having movable tracks with transverse
corrugations upon the periphery of the movable tracks or farm tractors or other
farm machinery, the operation of which upon a highway would otherwise be
prohibited under this section.

(4) Tires with metal
studs imbedded therein may be used between November 1st and April 1st upon
school buses and fire department vehicles, any law or regulation to the
contrary notwithstanding.

Sec. 2. RCW 47.36.250 and 1987 c
330 s 747 are each amended to read as follows:

If the department or
its delegate determines at any time for any part of the public highway system
that the unsafe conditions of the roadway require particular tires, tire
chains, or traction equipment in addition to or beyond the ordinary pneumatic
rubber tires, the department may establish the following recommendations or
requirements with respect to the use of such equipment for all persons using
such public highway:

(1) Dangerous road
conditions, chains or other approved traction devices recommended.

(2) Dangerous road
conditions, chains or other approved traction devices required.

(3) Dangerous road
conditions, chains required.

Any equipment that may
be required by this section shall be approved by the state patrol as authorized
under RCW 46.37.420.

The department shall
place and maintain signs and other traffic control devices on the public
highways that indicate the tire, tire chain, or traction equipment
recommendation or requirement determined under this section. Such signs or
traffic control devices shall in no event prohibit the use of studded tires ((from
November 1st to April 1st)) when used in accordance with RCW 46.37.420,
but when the department determines that chains are required and that no other
traction equipment will suffice, the requirement is applicable to all types of
tires including studded tires. The signs or traffic control devices may
specify different recommendations or requirements for four wheel drive vehicles
in gear.

Failure to
obey a requirement indicated by a sign or other traffic control device placed
or maintained under this section is a misdemeanor.

---
END ---