BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF
WASHINGTON:

_5 NEW SECTION. Sec. 1. A new section is
added to chapter 46.61

_6 RCW under the subchapter heading "miscellaneous
rules" to read as

_7 follows:

_8 (1) Any person who refuses to pay or evades payment
for motor

_9 vehicle fuel that is pumped into a motor vehicle is
guilty of

10 theft of motor vehicle fuel. A violation of this
subsection is a

11 gross misdemeanor punishable under chapter 9A.20 RCW.

12 (2) The license, permit, or nonresident driving
privilege of

13 any person convicted of theft of motor vehicle fuel must
be

14 suspended by the department for six months.

15 Sec. 2. RCW
46.20.311 and 2000 c 115 s 7 are each amended to read

16 as follows:

17 (1)(a) The department shall not suspend a driver's
license or

p. 1 HB
1895

_1 privilege to drive a motor vehicle on the public
highways for a

_2 fixed period of more than one year, except as
specifically

_3 permitted under RCW 46.20.267, 46.20.342, or other
provision of

_4 law. Except for a suspension under RCW 46.20.267,
46.20.289,

_5 46.20.291(5), 46.61.--- (section 1 of this act),
or 74.20A.320,

_6 whenever the license or driving privilege of any person
is

_7 suspended by reason of a conviction, a finding that a
traffic

_8 infraction has been committed, pursuant to chapter 46.29
RCW, or

_9 pursuant to RCW 46.20.291 or 46.20.308, the suspension
shall

10 remain in effect until the person gives and thereafter
maintains

11 proof of financial responsibility for the future as provided
in

12 chapter 46.29 RCW. If the suspension is the result of a
violation

13 of RCW 46.61.502 or 46.61.504, the department shall
determine the

14 person's eligibility for licensing based upon the
reports provided

15 by the alcoholism agency or probation department
designated under

16 RCW 46.61.5056 and shall deny reinstatement until
enrollment and

17 participation in an approved program has been
established and the

18 person is otherwise qualified. Whenever the license or
driving

19 privilege of any person is suspended as a result of
certification

20 of noncompliance with a child support order under
chapter 74.20A

21 RCW or a residential or visitation order, the suspension
shall

22 remain in effect until the person provides a release
issued by the

23 department of social and health services stating that
the person

24 is in compliance with the order.

25 (b)(i) The department shall not issue to the person
a new,

26 duplicate, or renewal license until the person pays a
reissue fee

27 of twenty dollars.

28 (ii) If the suspension is the result of a violation
of RCW

29 46.61.502 or 46.61.504, or is the result of
administrative action

30 under RCW 46.20.308, the reissue fee shall be one
hundred fifty

31 dollars.

32 (2)(a) Any person whose license or privilege to
drive a motor

33 vehicle on the public highways has been revoked, unless
the

34 revocation was for a cause which has been removed, is
not entitled

35 to have the license or privilege renewed or restored
until: (i)

36 After the expiration of one year from the date the
license or

37 privilege to drive was revoked; (ii) after the
expiration of the

38 applicable revocation period provided by RCW 46.20.3101
or

HB 1895 p. 2

_1 46.61.5055; (iii) after the expiration of two years for
persons

_2 convicted of vehicular homicide; or (iv) after the
expiration of

_3 the applicable revocation period provided by RCW
46.20.265.

_4 (b)(i) After the expiration of the appropriate
period, the

_5 person may make application for a new license as
provided by law

_6 together with a reissue fee in the amount of twenty
dollars.

_7 (ii) If the revocation is the result of a violation
of RCW

_8 46.20.308, 46.61.502, or 46.61.504, the reissue fee
shall be one

_9 hundred fifty dollars. If the revocation is the result
of a

10 violation of RCW 46.61.502 or 46.61.504, the department
shall

11 determine the person's eligibility for licensing based
upon the

12 reports provided by the alcoholism agency or probation
department

13 designated under RCW 46.61.5056 and shall deny
reissuance of a

14 license, permit, or privilege to drive until enrollment
and

15 participation in an approved program has been
established and the

16 person is otherwise qualified.

17 (c) Except for a revocation under RCW 46.20.265, the
department

18 shall not then issue a new license unless it is
satisfied after

19 investigation of the driving ability of the person that
it will be

20 safe to grant the privilege of driving a motor vehicle
on the

21 public highways, and until the person gives and
thereafter

22 maintains proof of financial responsibility for the
future as

23 provided in chapter 46.29 RCW. For a revocation under
RCW

24 46.20.265, the department shall not issue a new license
unless it

25 is satisfied after investigation of the driving ability
of the

26 person that it will be safe to grant that person the
privilege of

27 driving a motor vehicle on the public highways.

28 (3)(a) Whenever the driver's license of any person
is suspended

29 pursuant to Article IV of the nonresident violators
compact or RCW

30 46.23.020 or 46.20.289 or 46.20.291(5), the department
shall not

31 issue to the person any new or renewal license until the
person

32 pays a reissue fee of twenty dollars.

33 (b) If the suspension is the result of a violation
of the laws

34 of this or any other state, province, or other
jurisdiction

35 involving (i) the operation or physical control of a
motor vehicle

36 upon the public highways while under the influence of
intoxicating

37 liquor or drugs, or (ii) the refusal to submit to a
chemical test

p. 3 HB
1895

_1 of the driver's blood alcohol content, the reissue fee
shall be

_2 one hundred fifty dollars.

_3 Sec. 3. RCW
46.20.342 and 2000 c 115 s 8 are each amended to read

_4 as follows:

_5 (1) It is unlawful for any person to drive a motor
vehicle in

_6 this state while that person is in a suspended or
revoked status

_7 or when his or her privilege to drive is suspended or
revoked in

_8 this or any other state. Any person who has a valid
Washington

_9 driver's license is not guilty of a violation of this
section.

10 (a) A person found to be an habitual offender under
chapter

11 46.65 RCW, who violates this section while an order of
revocation

12 issued under chapter 46.65 RCW prohibiting such
operation is in

13 effect, is guilty of driving while license suspended or
revoked in

14 the first degree, a gross misdemeanor. Upon the first
such

15 conviction, the person shall be punished by imprisonment
for not

16 less than ten days. Upon the second conviction, the
person shall be

17 punished by imprisonment for not less than ninety days.
Upon the

18 third or subsequent conviction, the person shall be
punished by

19 imprisonment for not less than one hundred eighty days.
If the

20 person is also convicted of the offense defined in RCW
46.61.502

21 or 46.61.504, when both convictions arise from the same
event, the

22 minimum sentence of confinement shall be not less than
ninety

23 days. The minimum sentence of confinement required
shall not be

24 suspended or deferred. A conviction under this
subsection does not

25 prevent a person from petitioning for reinstatement as
provided by

26 RCW 46.65.080.

27 (b) A person who violates this section while an
order of

28 suspension or revocation prohibiting such operation is
in effect

29 and while the person is not eligible to reinstate his or
her

30 driver's license or driving privilege, other than for a
suspension

31 for the reasons described in (c) of this subsection, is
guilty of

32 driving while license suspended or revoked in the second
degree, a

33 gross misdemeanor. This subsection applies when a
person's driver's

34 license or driving privilege has been suspended or
revoked by

35 reason of:

36 (i) A conviction of a felony in the commission of
which a motor

37 vehicle was used;

HB 1895 p. 4

_1 (ii) A previous conviction under this section;

_2 (iii) A notice received by the department from a
court or

_3 diversion unit as provided by RCW 46.20.265, relating to
a minor

_4 who has committed, or who has entered a diversion unit
concerning

_5 an offense relating to alcohol, legend drugs, controlled

_6 substances, or imitation controlled substances;

_7 (iv) A conviction of RCW 46.20.410, relating to the
violation

_8 of restrictions of an occupational driver's license;

_9 (v) A conviction of RCW 46.20.345, relating to the
operation of

10 a motor vehicle with a suspended or revoked license;

11 (vi) A conviction of RCW 46.52.020, relating to duty
in case of

12 injury to or death of a person or damage to an attended
vehicle;

13 (vii) A conviction of RCW 46.61.024, relating to
attempting to

14 elude pursuing police vehicles;

15 (viii) A conviction of RCW 46.61.500, relating to
reckless

16 driving;

17 (ix) A conviction of RCW 46.61.502 or 46.61.504,
relating to a

18 person under the influence of intoxicating liquor or
drugs;

19 (x) A conviction of RCW 46.61.520, relating to
vehicular

20 homicide;

21 (xi) A conviction of RCW 46.61.522, relating to
vehicular

22 assault;

23 (xii) A conviction of RCW 46.61.527(4), relating to
reckless

24 endangerment of roadway workers;

25 (xiii) A conviction of RCW 46.61.530, relating to
racing of

26 vehicles on highways;

27 (xiv) A conviction of RCW 46.61.685, relating to
leaving

28 children in an unattended vehicle with motor running;

29 (xv) A conviction of RCW 46.61.--- (section 1 of
this act),

30 relating to theft of motor vehicle fuel;

31 (xvi) A conviction of RCW 46.64.048, relating
to attempting,

32 aiding, abetting, coercing, and committing crimes;

33 (((xvi))) (xvii) An administrative
action taken by the

34 department under chapter 46.20 RCW; or

35 (((xvii))) (xviii) A conviction of a
local law, ordinance,

36 regulation, or resolution of a political subdivision of
this

37 state, the federal government, or any other state, of an
offense

38 substantially similar to a violation included in this
subsection.

p. 5 HB
1895

_1 (c) A person who violates this section when his or
her driver's

_2 license or driving privilege is, at the time of the
violation,

_3 suspended or revoked solely because (i) the person must
furnish

_4 proof of satisfactory progress in a required alcoholism
or drug

_5 treatment program, (ii) the person must furnish proof of
financial

_6 responsibility for the future as provided by chapter
46.29 RCW,

_7 (iii) the person has failed to comply with the
provisions of

_8 chapter 46.29 RCW relating to uninsured accidents, (iv)
the person

_9 has failed to respond to a notice of traffic infraction,
failed to

10 appear at a requested hearing, violated a written
promise to

11 appear in court, or has failed to comply with the terms
of a

12 notice of traffic infraction or citation, as provided in
RCW

13 46.20.289, (v) the person has committed an offense in
another

14 state that, if committed in this state, would not be
grounds for

15 the suspension or revocation of the person's driver's
license,

16 (vi) the person has been suspended or revoked by reason
of one or

17 more of the items listed in (b) of this subsection, but
was

18 eligible to reinstate his or her driver's license or
driving

19 privilege at the time of the violation, or (vii) the
person has

20 received traffic citations or notices of traffic
infraction that

21 have resulted in a suspension under RCW 46.20.267
relating to

22 intermediate drivers' licenses, or any combination of
(i) through

23 (vii), is guilty of driving while license suspended or
revoked in

24 the third degree, a misdemeanor.

25 (2) Upon receiving a record of conviction of any
person or upon

26 receiving an order by any juvenile court or any duly
authorized

27 court officer of the conviction of any juvenile under
this

28 section, the department shall:

29 (a) For a conviction of driving while suspended or
revoked in

30 the first degree, as provided by subsection (1)(a) of
this

31 section, extend the period of administrative revocation
imposed

32 under chapter 46.65 RCW for an additional period of one
year from

33 and after the date the person would otherwise have been
entitled

34 to apply for a new license or have his or her driving
privilege

35 restored; or

36 (b) For a conviction of driving while suspended or
revoked in

37 the second degree, as provided by subsection (1)(b) of
this

38 section, not issue a new license or restore the driving
privilege

HB 1895 p. 6

_1 for an additional period of one year from and after the
date the

_2 person would otherwise have been entitled to apply for a
new

_3 license or have his or her driving privilege restored;
or

_4 (c) Not extend the period of suspension or
revocation if the

_5 conviction was under subsection (1)(c) of this section.
If the

_6 conviction was under subsection (1)(a) or (b) of this
section and

_7 the court recommends against the extension and the
convicted

_8 person has obtained a valid driver's license, the period
of

_9 suspension or revocation shall not be extended.

10 Sec. 4. RCW
46.63.020 and 1999 c 86 s 6 are each amended to read

11 as follows:

12 Failure to perform any act required or the
performance of any

13 act prohibited by this title or an equivalent
administrative

14 regulation or local law, ordinance, regulation, or
resolution

15 relating to traffic including parking, standing,
stopping, and

16 pedestrian offenses, is designated as a traffic
infraction and may

17 not be classified as a criminal offense, except for an
offense

18 contained in the following provisions of this title or a
violation

19 of an equivalent administrative regulation or local law,

20 ordinance, regulation, or resolution:

21 (1) RCW 46.09.120(2) relating to the operation of a
nonhighway

22 vehicle while under the influence of intoxicating liquor
or a

23 controlled substance;

24 (2) RCW 46.09.130 relating to operation of nonhighway
vehicles;

25 (3) RCW 46.10.090(2) relating to the operation of a
snowmobile

26 while under the influence of intoxicating liquor or
narcotics or

27 habit‑forming drugs or in a manner endangering the
person of

28 another;

29 (4) RCW 46.10.130 relating to the operation of
snowmobiles;

30 (5) Chapter 46.12 RCW relating to certificates of
ownership and

31 registration and markings indicating that a vehicle has
been

32 destroyed or declared a total loss;

33 (6) RCW 46.16.010 relating to initial registration
of motor

34 vehicles;

35 (7) RCW 46.16.011 relating to permitting
unauthorized persons

36 to drive;

37 (8) RCW 46.16.160 relating to vehicle trip permits;

p. 7 HB
1895

_1 (9) RCW 46.16.381(2) relating to knowingly providing
false

_2 information in conjunction with an application for a
special

_3 placard or license plate for disabled persons' parking;

_4 (10) RCW 46.20.005 relating to driving without a
valid driver's

_5 license;

_6 (11) RCW 46.20.091 relating to false statements
regarding a

_7 driver's license or instruction permit;

_8 (12) RCW ((46.20.336)) 46.20.0921
relating to the unlawful

_9 possession and use of a driver's license;

10 (13) RCW 46.20.342 relating to driving with a
suspended or

11 revoked license or status;

12 (14) RCW 46.20.345 relating to the operation of a
motor vehicle

13 with a suspended or revoked license;

14 (15) RCW 46.20.410 relating to the violation
of restrictions of

15 an occupational driver's license;

16 (((15) RCW 46.20.420 relating to the operation of
a motor

17 vehicle with a suspended or revoked license;))

18 (16) RCW 46.20.740 relating to operation of a motor
vehicle

19 without an ignition interlock device in violation of a
license

20 notation that the device is required;

21 (17) RCW 46.20.750 relating to assisting another
person to

22 start a vehicle equipped with an ignition interlock
device;

23 (18) RCW 46.25.170 relating to commercial driver's
licenses;

24 (19) Chapter 46.29 RCW relating to financial
responsibility;

25 (20) RCW 46.30.040 relating to providing false
evidence of

26 financial responsibility;

27 (21) RCW 46.37.435 relating to wrongful installation
of

28 sunscreening material;

29 (22) RCW 46.44.180 relating to operation of mobile
home pilot

30 vehicles;

31 (23) RCW 46.48.175 relating to the transportation of
dangerous

32 articles;

33 (24) RCW 46.52.010 relating to duty on striking an
unattended

34 car or other property;

35 (25) RCW 46.52.020 relating to duty in case of
injury to or

36 death of a person or damage to an attended vehicle;

37 (26) RCW 46.52.090 relating to reports by repairmen,

38 storagemen, and appraisers;

HB 1895 p. 8

_1 (27) RCW 46.52.130 relating to confidentiality of
the driving

_2 record to be furnished to an insurance company, an
employer, and

_3 an alcohol/drug assessment or treatment agency;

_4 (28) RCW 46.55.020 relating to engaging in the
activities of a

_5 registered tow truck operator without a registration
certificate;

_6 (29) RCW 46.55.035 relating to prohibited practices
by tow

_7 truck operators;

_8 (30) RCW 46.61.015 relating to obedience to police
officers,

_9 ((flagmen)) flaggers, or fire fighters;

10 (31) RCW 46.61.020 relating to refusal to give
information to

11 or cooperate with an officer;

12 (32) RCW 46.61.022 relating to failure to stop and
give

13 identification to an officer;

14 (33) RCW 46.61.024 relating to attempting to elude
pursuing

15 police vehicles;

16 (34) RCW 46.61.500 relating to reckless driving;

17 (35) RCW 46.61.502 and 46.61.504 relating to persons
under the

18 influence of intoxicating liquor or drugs;

19 (36) RCW 46.61.503 relating to a person under age
twenty-one

20 driving a motor vehicle after consuming alcohol;

21 (37) RCW 46.61.520 relating to vehicular homicide by
motor

22 vehicle;

23 (38) RCW 46.61.522 relating to vehicular assault;

24 (39) RCW 46.61.5249 relating to first degree
negligent driving;

25 (40) RCW 46.61.527(4) relating to reckless
endangerment of

26 roadway workers;

27 (41) RCW 46.61.530 relating to racing of vehicles on
highways;

28 (42) RCW 46.61.685 relating to leaving children in
an

29 unattended vehicle with the motor running;

30 (43) RCW 46.61.--- (section 1 of this act)
relating to theft of

31 motor vehicle fuel;

32 (44) RCW 46.64.010 relating to unlawful
cancellation of or

33 attempt to cancel a traffic citation;

34 (((44))) (45) RCW 46.64.048 relating
to attempting, aiding,

35 abetting, coercing, and committing crimes;

36 (((45))) (46) Chapter 46.65 RCW
relating to habitual traffic

37 offenders;

p. 9 HB
1895

_1 (((46))) (47) RCW 46.68.010 relating
to false statements made

_2 to obtain a refund;

_3 (((47))) (48) Chapter 46.70 RCW
relating to unfair motor

_4 vehicle business practices, except where that chapter
provides for

_5 the assessment of monetary penalties of a civil nature;

_6 (((48))) (49) Chapter 46.72 RCW
relating to the transportation

_7 of passengers in for hire vehicles;

_8 (((49))) (50) RCW 46.72A.060 relating
to limousine carrier

_9 insurance;

10 (((50))) (51) RCW 46.72A.070 relating
to operation of a

11 limousine without a vehicle certificate;

12 (((51))) (52) RCW 46.72A.080 relating
to false advertising by a

13 limousine carrier;

14 (((52))) (53) Chapter 46.80 RCW
relating to motor vehicle

15 wreckers;

16 (((53))) (54) Chapter 46.82 RCW
relating to driver's training

17 schools;

18 (((54))) (55) RCW 46.87.260 relating
to alteration or forgery

19 of a cab card, letter of authority, or other temporary
authority

20 issued under chapter 46.87 RCW;

21 (((55))) (56) RCW 46.87.290 relating
to operation of an

22 unregistered or unlicensed vehicle under chapter 46.87
RCW.

‑‑‑ END ‑‑‑

HB 1895 p. 10