BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF
WASHINGTON:

_5 NEW SECTION. Sec. 1. The implementation
schedule for rules

_6 dealing with musculoskeletal disorders, adopted on May
26, 2000,

_7 by the director of the department of labor and
industries, and

_8 codified as WAC 296-62-05101 through 296-62-05176, shall
be

_9 adjusted to take effect two years later than stated in
the rule.

10 Prior to implementation of the rules, the director shall
make

11 revisions to the rules necessary to impose only the same

12 requirements as rules adopted by the United States
secretary of

13 labor under the authority of the Occupational Safety and
Health

14 Act of 1970 (Public Law 91-596; 84 Stat. 1590) including
revisions

15 to implement the final judgments for appeals filed prior
to July

16 1, 2001, challenging the validity or content of the
federal rules,

17 and not adopting provisions which impose requirements
which are

18 still the subject of appeals where no final judgment has
been

p. 1 HB
1896

_1 entered. For the purposes of this section, "final
judgment" means a

_2 judgment from which the plaintiffs have no additional
appeal

_3 rights.

_4 Sec. 2. RCW
49.17.040 and 1973 c 80 s 4 are each amended to read

_5 as follows:

_6 Except as provided in section 1 of this act, the
director shall

_7 make, adopt, modify, and repeal rules and regulations
governing

_8 safety and health standards for conditions of employment
as

_9 authorized by this chapter after a public hearing in
conformance

10 with the administrative procedure act and the provisions
of this

11 chapter. At least thirty days prior to such public
hearing, the

12 director shall cause public notice of such hearing to be
made in

13 newspapers of general circulation in this state, of the
date,

14 time, and place of such public hearing, along with a
general

15 description of the subject matter of the proposed rules
and

16 information as to where copies of any rules and
regulations

17 proposed for adoption may be obtained and with a
solicitation for

18 recommendations in writing or suggestions for inclusion
or changes

19 in such rules to be submitted not later than five days
prior to

20 such public hearing. Any preexisting rules adopted by
the

21 department of labor and industries relating to health
and safety

22 standards in work places subject to the jurisdiction of
the

23 department shall remain effective insofar as such rules
are not

24 inconsistent with the provisions of this chapter.

25 Sec. 3. RCW
49.17.050 and 1998 c 224 s 1 are each amended to read

26 as follows:

27 Except as provided in RCW 49.17.040, in the
adoption of rules

28 and regulations under the authority of this chapter, the
director

29 shall:

30 (1) Provide for the preparation, adoption,
amendment, or repeal

31 of rules and regulations of safety and health standards
governing

32 the conditions of employment of general and special
application in

33 all work places;

34 (2) Provide for the adoption of occupational health
and safety

35 standards which are at least as effective as those
adopted or

HB 1896 p. 2

_1 recognized by the United States secretary of labor under
the

_2 authority of the Occupational Safety and Health Act of
1970

_3 (Public Law 91-596; 84 Stat. 1590);

_4 (3) Provide a method of encouraging employers and
employees in

_5 their efforts to reduce the number of safety and health
hazards at

_6 their work places and to stimulate employers and
employees to

_7 institute new and to perfect existing programs for
providing safe

_8 and healthful working conditions;

_9 (4) Provide for the promulgation of health and
safety standards

10 and the control of conditions in all work places
concerning gases,

11 vapors, dust, or other airborne particles, toxic
materials, or

12 harmful physical agents which shall set a standard which
most

13 adequately assures, to the extent feasible, on the basis
of the

14 best available evidence, that no employee will suffer
material

15 impairment of health or functional capacity even if such
employee

16 has regular exposure to the hazard dealt with by such
standard for

17 the period of his working life; any such standards shall
require

18 where appropriate the use of protective devices or
equipment and

19 for monitoring or measuring any such gases, vapors,
dust, or other

20 airborne particles, toxic materials, or harmful physical
agents;

21 (5) Provide for appropriate reporting procedures by
employers

22 with respect to such information relating to conditions
of

23 employment which will assist in achieving the objectives
of this

24 chapter;

25 (6) Provide for the frequency, method, and manner of
the making

26 of inspections of work places without advance notice;
and,

27 (7) Provide for the publication and dissemination to
employers,

28 employees, and labor organizations and the posting where

29 appropriate by employers of informational, education, or
training

30 materials calculated to aid and assist in achieving the
objectives

31 of this chapter;

32 (8) Provide for the establishment of new and the
perfection and

33 expansion of existing programs for occupational safety
and health

34 education for employers and employees, and, in addition
institute

35 methods and procedures for the establishment of a
program for

36 voluntary compliance solely through the use of advice
and

37 consultation with employers and employees with
recommendations

38 including recommendations of methods to abate violations
relating

p. 3 HB
1896

_1 to the requirements of this chapter and all applicable
safety and

_2 health standards and rules and regulations promulgated
pursuant to

_3 the authority of this chapter;

_4 (9) Provide for the adoption of safety and health
standards

_5 requiring the use of safeguards in trenches and
excavations and

_6 around openings of hoistways, hatchways, elevators,
stairways, and

_7 similar openings;

_8 (10) Provide for the promulgation of health and
safety

_9 standards requiring the use of safeguards for all vats,
pans,

10 trimmers, cut off, gang edger, and other saws, planers,
presses,

11 formers, cogs, gearing, belting, shafting, coupling, set
screws,

12 live rollers, conveyors, mangles in laundries, and
machinery of

13 similar description, which can be effectively guarded
with due

14 regard to the ordinary use of such machinery and
appliances and

15 the danger to employees therefrom, and with which the
employees of

16 any such work place may come in contact while in the
performance

17 of their duties and prescribe methods, practices, or
processes to

18 be followed by employers which will enhance the health
and safety

19 of employees in the performance of their duties when in
proximity

20 to machinery or appliances mentioned in this subsection;

21 (11) Certify that no later than twenty business days
prior to

22 the effective date of any significant legislative rule,
as defined

23 by RCW 34.05.328, a meeting of impacted parties is
convened to:

24 (a) Identify ambiguities and problem areas in the rule;
(b)

25 coordinate education and public relations efforts by all
parties;

26 (c) provide comments regarding internal department
training and

27 enforcement plans; and (d) provide comments regarding
appropriate

28 evaluation mechanisms to determine the effectiveness of
the new

29 rule. The meeting shall include a balanced
representation of both

30 business and labor from impacted industries, department
personnel

31 responsible for the above subject areas, and other
agencies or key

32 stakeholder groups as determined by the department. An
existing

33 advisory committee may be utilized if appropriate.

‑‑‑ END ‑‑‑

HB 1896 p. 4