BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF
WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec.
1. A new section is added
to chapter 43.24 RCW to read as follows:

Social security
numbers and drivers' license numbers may not be used as part of a professional
license. Professional licenses containing such information that are in
existence on the effective date of this section shall comply with this section
by the next renewal date.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 2. This act takes effect
January 1, 2002.

---
END ---