BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF
WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1. RCW 27.12.190 and 1982 c
123 s 8 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) The
management and control of a library shall be vested in a board of either five or
seven trustees, as ((hereinafter)) provided in this
section ((provided)).

(a) In cities
and towns five trustees shall be either appointed by the mayor with the
consent of the legislative body or elected to six-year staggered terms
through the process defined in section 2 of this act and assume office in
accordance with RCW 29.04.170.

(b) In counties,
rural county library districts, and island library districts, five trustees
shall be either appointed by the board of county commissioners or
elected to six-year staggered terms of office by the voters in the district
through the process defined in section 2 of this act.

(c) In a
regional library district a board of either five or seven trustees shall be either
appointed by the joint action of the legislative bodies concerned or elected
to six-year staggered terms of office through the process described in section
2 of this act.

(d) In
intercounty rural library districts a board of either five or seven trustees
shall be either appointed by the joint action of the boards of county
commissioners of each of the counties included in a district or elected to
six-year staggered terms of office through the process described in section 2
of this act.

(2) The first
appointments for boards comprised of but five trustees shall be for terms of
one, two, three, four, and five years respectively, and thereafter a trustee
shall be appointed annually to serve for five years. The first appointments
for boards comprised of seven trustees shall be for terms of one, two, three,
four, five, six, and seven years respectively, and thereafter a trustee shall
be appointed annually to serve for seven years. No person shall be appointed
to any board of trustees for more than two consecutive terms. Vacancies shall
be filled for unexpired terms as soon as possible in the manner in which
members of the board are regularly chosen.

(3) A library
trustee shall not receive a salary or other compensation for services as
trustee, but necessary expenses actually incurred shall be paid from the
library funds.

((A)) (4) An
appointed library trustee in the case of a city or town may be removed only
by vote of the legislative body. ((A)) An appointed trustee of a
county library, a rural county library district library, or an island library
district library may be removed for just cause by the county commissioners
after a public hearing upon a written complaint stating the ground for removal,
which complaint, with a notice of the time and place of hearing, shall have
been served upon the trustee at least fifteen days before the hearing. ((A))
An appointed trustee of an intercounty rural library district may be
removed by the joint action of the board of county commissioners of the
counties involved in the same manner as provided herein for the removal of a
trustee of a county library.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
2. A new section is added
to chapter 27.12 RCW to read as follows:

(1) Library district
trustees may be established as elected positions in a library district
authorized in this chapter either: (a) By an ordinance stating the intent to
change to elected trustees by the library district legislative body; or (b)
upon a petition signed by at least ten percent of the registered voters in the
district, by an ordinance stating the intent to change to elected trustees by
the library district legislative body. The process to elect initial trustees
shall be as described in subsections (3) through (5) of this section.

(2) Except for the
initial trustees, library trustees are elected to six-year staggered terms of
office at general elections held in odd-numbered years. Trustees serve until
their successors are elected and qualified and assume office in accordance with
RCW 29.04.170. Vacancies shall occur and be filled as provided in chapter
42.12 RCW.

(3) Initial library
trustees shall be elected at the next municipal or special election after the
ordinance authorizing the election of library trustees. Each candidate shall
run for one of five or seven separate library trustee positions. A special
filing period shall be opened as provided in RCW 29.15.170 and 29.15.180. The
person receiving the greatest number of votes for each position is elected to
that position. The initial library trustees assume office immediately when
they are elected and qualified, but their terms of office are calculated from
the first day of January after their election.

(4) Staggering of the
terms of office for the initial library trustees on a five-member board of
trustees shall be accomplished as follows: (a) The two persons who are elected
receiving the two greatest numbers of votes are elected to six-year terms of
office if the election is held in an odd-numbered year or five-year terms of
office if the election is held in an even-numbered year; (b) the two persons
who are elected receiving the next two greatest numbers of votes are elected to
four-year terms of office if the election is held in an odd-numbered year or
three-year terms of office if the election is held in an even-numbered year;
and (c) the other person who is elected is elected to a two-year term of office
if the election is held in an odd-numbered year or a one-year term of office if
the election is held in an even-numbered year.

(5) Staggering of the
terms of office for the initial library trustees on a seven-member board of
trustees is accomplished as follows: (a) The three persons who are elected
receiving the three greatest numbers of votes are elected to six-year terms of
office if the election is held in an odd-numbered year or five-year terms of
office if the election is held in an even-numbered year; (b) the two persons
who are elected receiving the next two greatest numbers of votes are elected to
four-year terms of office if the election is held in an odd-numbered year or
three-year terms of office if the election is held in an even-numbered year;
and (c) the other two persons who are elected are elected to two-year terms of
office if the election is held in an odd-numbered year or a one-year term of
office if the election is held in an even-numbered year.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
3. A new section is added
to chapter 27.12 RCW to read as follows:

The board of trustees
of a library district may divide the library district into trustee districts
equal to the number of members on the board of trustees. Each trustee district
shall have approximately the same population and shall follow the boundaries of
precincts. Trustee districts shall be redrawn as provided in chapter 29.70
RCW.

Library trustee
districts shall be used as follows: (1) Only a registered voter who resides in
a trustee district may be a candidate for, or serve as, a trustee of the trustee
district; and (2) only voters of a trustee district may vote at a primary to
nominate candidates for a trustee of the trustee district. Voters of the
entire library district may vote at a general election to elect a person as a
trustee of the trustee district.

Sec. 4. RCW 27.12.010 and 1994 c
198 s 1 are each amended to read as follows:

As used in this
chapter, unless the context requires a different meaning:

(1) "Governmental
unit" means any county, city, town, rural county library district,
intercounty rural library district, rural partial-county library district, or
island library district;

(2) "Legislative
body" means the body authorized to determine the amount of taxes to be
levied in a governmental unit; in rural county library districts, in
intercounty rural library districts, and in island library districts, the
legislative body shall be the board of library trustees of the district;

(3) "Library"
means a free public library supported in whole or in part with money derived
from taxation;

(4) "Library
district" means a rural county library district, intercounty rural library
district, rural partial-county library district, or island library district;

(5)
"Regional library" means a free public library maintained by two or
more counties or other governmental units as provided in RCW 27.12.080;

(((5))) (6)
"Rural county library district" means a ((library serving)) municipal
corporation organized to provide library services to all the unincorporated
area of a county ((not included within the area of incorporated cities and
towns: PROVIDED, That)), but any city or town with a population of
one hundred thousand or less at the time of annexation may ((be included
therein)) annex into a rural county library district as provided in
RCW 27.12.360 through 27.12.390;

(((6))) (7)
"Intercounty rural library district" means a municipal corporation
organized to provide library service for all unincorporated areas ((outside
of incorporated cities and towns)) within two or more counties((:
PROVIDED, That)), but any city or town with a population of one
hundred thousand or less at the time of annexation may ((be included therein))
annex into an intercounty rural library district as provided in RCW
27.12.360 through 27.12.390;

(((7))) (8)
"Island library district" means a municipal corporation organized to
provide library service for all unincorporated areas ((outside of
incorporated cities and towns)) on a single island only, and not all of the
unincorporated area of the county, in counties composed entirely of
islands and having a population of less than twenty-five thousand at the time
the island library district was created((: PROVIDED, That)), but
any city or town with a population of one hundred thousand or less at the time
of annexation may ((be included therein)) annex into an island
library district as provided in RCW 27.12.360 through 27.12.390; and

(((8))) (9)
"Rural partial-county library district" means a municipal corporation
organized to provide library service for a portion of the unincorporated area
of a county((.)), but any city or town located in the same county
as a rural partial-county library district may annex to the district if the
city or town has a population of one hundred thousand or less at the time of
annexation.

Sec. 5. RCW 54.28.055 and 1986 c
189 s 1 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) After computing the
tax imposed by RCW 54.28.025(1), the department of revenue shall instruct the
state treasurer to distribute the amount collected as follows:

(a) Fifty percent to
the state general fund for the support of schools; and

(b) Twenty-two percent
to the counties, twenty-three percent to the cities, three percent to the fire
protection districts, and two percent to the library districts.

(2) Each county, city,
fire protection district and library district shall receive a percentage of the
amount for distribution to counties, cities, fire protection districts and
library districts, respectively, in the proportion that the population of such
district residing within the impacted area bears to the total population of all
such districts residing within the impacted area. For the purposes of this
chapter, the term "library district" includes only regional libraries
as defined in RCW 27.12.010(((4))) (5), rural county library
districts as defined in RCW 27.12.010(((5))) (6), intercounty
rural library districts as defined in RCW 27.12.010(((6))) (7),
and island library districts as defined in RCW 27.12.010(((7))) (8).
The population of a library district, for purposes of such a distribution,
shall not include any population within the library district and the impact
area that also is located within a city or town.

(3) If any distribution
pursuant to subsection (1)(b) of this section cannot be made, then that share
shall be prorated among the state and remaining local districts.

(4) All distributions
directed by this section to be made on the basis of population shall be
calculated in accordance with data to be provided by the office of financial
management.

Sec. 6. RCW 27.12.040 and 1990 c
259 s 1 are each amended to read as follows:

The procedure for the
establishment of a rural county library district shall be as follows:

(1) Petitions signed by
at least ten percent of the registered voters of the unincorporated area of
a county who voted in the last general election, ((outside of the area
of incorporated cities and towns,)) asking that the question, "Shall a
rural county library district be established?" be submitted to a vote of
the ((people)) registered voters residing in the unincorporated area
of the county, shall be filed with the county legislative authority.

(2) The county
legislative authority, after having determined that the petitions were signed
by the requisite number of registered voters, shall place the proposition for
the establishment of a rural county library district on the ballot for the vote
of the ((people)) registered voters of the unincorporated area
of the county, ((outside incorporated cities and towns,)) at the
next succeeding general or special election.

(3) If a
majority of those voting on the proposition vote in favor of the establishment
of the rural county library district, the county legislative authority shall
forthwith declare it established.

Sec. 7. RCW 27.12.050 and 1973
1st ex.s. c 195 s 5 are each amended to read as follows:

((After the board of
county commissioners has declared a rural county library district established,
it shall appoint a board of library trustees and provide)) Funds for
the establishment and maintenance of library service for the district shall
be provided by making a tax levy on the property in the district of not
more than fifty cents per thousand dollars of assessed value per year
sufficient for the library service ((as shown to be required by the budget
submitted to the board of county commissioners by the board of library trustees)),
and by making a tax levy in such further amount as shall be authorized pursuant
to RCW 27.12.222 or 84.52.052 or 84.52.056. ((Such)) The board of
trustees shall determine the levy or levies and certify the levy or levies to
the county legislative authority. Levies shall be a part of the general
tax roll and shall be collected as a part of the general taxes against the
property in the district.

Sec. 8. RCW 27.12.420 and 1982 c
123 s 4 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) Immediately
following the establishment of an island library district, the board of county
commissioners shall either: (a) Appoint a board of library trustees for
the district in accordance with RCW 27.12.190; or (b) provide for the
initial board of trustees for an island library district to be elected as
provided in section 2 of this act. The board of trustees shall appoint a
librarian for the district.

(2) Funds for
the establishment and maintenance of the library service of the district shall
be provided by ((the board of county commissioners by)) means of an
annual tax levy on the property in the district of not more than fifty cents
per thousand dollars of assessed value per year. The tax levy shall be based
on a budget to be compiled by the board of trustees of the island library
district who shall determine the tax rate necessary and certify their
determination to the ((board of county commissioners)) county
legislative authority.

(3) Excess
levies authorized pursuant to RCW 27.12.222, 84.52.052, or 84.52.056 shall be
at a rate determined by the board of trustees of the island library district
and certified to the ((board of county commissioners)) county
legislative authority.

Sec. 9. RCW 27.12.470 and 1999 c
153 s 25 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) A rural
partial-county library district may be created in a portion of the
unincorporated area of a county as provided in this section if a rural county
library district, intercounty rural library district, or island library
district has not been created in the county.

(2) The
procedure to create a rural partial-county library district is initiated by the
filing of petitions with the county auditor proposing the creation of the
district that have been signed by at least ten percent of the registered voters
residing in the area proposed to be included in the rural partial-county
library district. The county auditor shall review the petitions and certify
the sufficiency or insufficiency of the signatures to the county legislative
authority.

(3) If the
petitions are certified as having sufficient valid signatures, the county
legislative authority shall hold a public hearing on the proposed rural
partial-county library district, may adjust the boundaries of the proposed
district, and may cause a ballot proposition to be submitted to the voters of
the proposed rural partial-county library district authorizing its creation if
the county legislative authority finds that the creation of the rural
partial-county library district is in the public interest. A subsequent public
hearing shall be held if additional territory is added to the proposed rural
partial-county library district by action of the county legislative authority.

(4) The rural
partial-county library district shall be created if the ballot proposition
authorizing the creation of the district is approved by a simple majority vote
of the voters voting on the proposition. Immediately after creation of the
rural partial-county library district the county legislative authority shall either:
(a) Appoint a board of library trustees for the district as provided under
RCW 27.12.190; or (b) provide for the initial board of trustees for a rural
partial-county library district to be elected as provided in section 2 of this
act.

(5) Except as
provided in this section, a rural partial-county library district is subject to
all the provisions of law applicable to a rural county library district and
shall have all the powers, duties, and authorities of a rural county library
district, including, but not limited to, the authority to impose property
taxes, incur debt, and annex a city or town with a population of less than one
hundred thousand at the time of the annexation that is located in the same
county as the rural partial-county library district.

(6) Adjacent
unincorporated territory in the county may be annexed to a rural partial-county
library district in the same manner as territory is annexed to a water-sewer
district, except that an annexation is not subject to potential review by a
boundary review board.

(7) If, at the
time of creation, a rural partial-county library district has an assessed
valuation of less than fifty million dollars, it may provide library services
only by contracting for the services through an interlocal agreement with an adjacent
library district, or an adjacent city or town that maintains its own library.
If the assessed valuation of the rural partial-county library district
subsequently reaches fifty million dollars as a result of annexation or
appreciation, the fifty million dollar limitation shall not apply.

(8) If a ballot
proposition is approved creating a rural county library district in the county,
every rural partial-county library district in that county shall be dissolved
and its assets and liabilities transferred to the rural county library
district. Where a rural partial-county library district has annexed a city or
town, the voters of the city or town shall be allowed to vote on the proposed
creation of a rural county library district and, if created, the rural county
library district shall include each city and town that was annexed to the rural
partial-county library district.

(9)
Nothing in this section authorizes the consolidation of a rural partial-county
library district with any rural county library district; island library
district; city, county, or regional library; intercounty library district; or
other rural partial-county library district, unless, in addition to any other
requirements imposed by statute, the boards of all library districts involved
approve the consolidation.

---
END ---