BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF
WASHINGTON:

_4 NEW SECTION. Sec. 1. A new section is
added to chapter 29.79

_5 RCW to read as follows:

_6 If an initiative, whether to the people or to the
legislature,

_7 would require spending public funds for its
implementation, the

_8 terms of the initiative must either specify an increase
in an

_9 existing state revenue source or provide a new tax or
fee, or a

10 combination thereof, adequate to fully implement the
program. If

11 the additional revenue is not adequate to fund the
requirements of

12 the initiative, the initiative is null and void in its
entirety.

‑‑‑ END ‑‑‑

p. 1 HB
1901