BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF
WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1. RCW 70.02.010 and 1993 c
448 s 1 are each amended to read as follows:

((As used in this
chapter, unless the context otherwise requires:)) The definitions in
this section apply throughout this chapter unless the context clearly requires
otherwise.

(1) "Audit"
means an assessment, evaluation, determination, or investigation of a health care
provider by a person not employed by or affiliated with the provider to
determine compliance with:

(a) Statutory,
regulatory, fiscal, medical, or scientific standards;

(b) A private or public
program of payments to a health care provider; or

(c) Requirements for
licensing, accreditation, or certification.

(2) "Directory
information" means information disclosing the presence, and for the
purpose of identification, the name, residence, sex, and the general health
condition of a particular patient who is a patient in a health care facility or
who is currently receiving emergency health care in a health care facility.

(3) "General
health condition" means the patient's health status described in terms of
"critical," "poor," "fair," "good,"
"excellent," or terms denoting similar conditions.

(4) "Health
care" means any care, service, or procedure provided by a health care
provider:

(a) To diagnose, treat,
or maintain a patient's physical or mental condition; or

(b) That affects the
structure or any function of the human body.

(5) "Health care
facility" means a hospital, clinic, nursing home, laboratory, office, or
similar place where a health care provider provides health care to patients.

(6) "Health care
information" means any information, whether oral or recorded in any form
or medium, that identifies or can readily be associated with the identity of a
patient and directly relates to the patient's health care, including a
patient's deoxyribonucleic acid and identified sequence of chemical base pairs.
The term includes any record of disclosures of health care information.

(7) "Health care
provider" means a person who is licensed, certified, registered, or
otherwise authorized by the law of this state to provide health care in the
ordinary course of business or practice of a profession.

(8) "Institutional
review board" means any board, committee, or other group formally
designated by an institution, or authorized under federal or state law, to
review, approve the initiation of, or conduct periodic review of research
programs to assure the protection of the rights and welfare of human research
subjects.

(9)
"Maintain," as related to health care information, means to hold,
possess, preserve, retain, store, or control that information.

(10)
"Patient" means an individual who receives or has received health
care. The term includes a deceased individual who has received health care.

(11) "Person"
means an individual, corporation, business trust, estate, trust, partnership,
association, joint venture, government, governmental subdivision or agency, or
any other legal or commercial entity.

(12) "Reasonable
fee" means the charges for duplicating or searching the record, but shall
not exceed sixty-five cents per page for the first thirty pages and fifty cents
per page for all other pages. In addition, a clerical fee for searching and
handling may be charged not to exceed fifteen dollars. These amounts shall be
adjusted biennially in accordance with changes in the consumer price index, all
consumers, for Seattle-Tacoma metropolitan statistical area as determined by
the secretary of health. However, where editing of records by a health care
provider is required by statute and is done by the provider personally, the fee
may be the usual and customary charge for a basic office visit.

(13)
"Third-party payor" means an insurer regulated under Title 48 RCW
authorized to transact business in this state or other jurisdiction, including
a health care service contractor, and health maintenance organization; or an
employee welfare benefit plan; or a state or federal health benefit program.

--- END ---