BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF
WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec.
1. A new section is added
to chapter 84.52 RCW to read as follows:

(1) There is allowed a
credit against the state regular real property tax equal to the tax imposed on
the first one hundred thousand dollars of assessed valuation of owner-occupied
residential property, multiplied by the indicated ratio fixed by the state
department of revenue. The credit in any tax year shall not exceed the amount
of state property tax imposed on the property.

(2) The credit in this
section is in addition to any other property tax relief that may be provided by
law.

(3) The following
conditions apply to the credit under this section:

(a) The residence must
be occupied by the person claiming the credit as a principal place of residence
as of January 1st of the year in which taxes are due. A person who sells,
transfers, or is displaced from the person's residence may transfer the
person's credit status to a replacement residence, but a claimant may not
receive a credit on more than one residence in any year. Confinement of the
person to a hospital or nursing home does not disqualify the claim of credit
if:

(i) The residence is
temporarily unoccupied;

(ii) The residence is
occupied by either or both a spouse or a person financially dependent on the
claimant for support; or

(iii) The residence is
rented for the purpose of paying nursing home or hospital costs.

(b) The person claiming
the credit must have owned, at the time of filing, in fee, as a life estate, or
by contract purchase, the residence on which the property taxes have been
imposed or if the person claiming the credit lives in a cooperative housing
association, corporation, or partnership, the person must own a share therein
representing the unit or portion of the structure in which the person resides.
For purposes of this subsection, a residence owned by a marital community or
owned by cotenants is deemed to be owned by each spouse or cotenant, and any
lease for life is deemed a life estate.

(4) RCW 84.36.383,
84.36.385, 84.36.387, and 84.36.389 apply to this section.

Sec. 2. RCW 84.52.080 and 1989 c
378 s 16 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) The county assessor
shall extend the taxes upon the tax rolls in the form herein prescribed. The
rate percent necessary to raise the amounts of taxes levied for state and
county purposes, and for purposes of taxing districts coextensive with the
county, shall be computed upon the assessed value of the property of the
county; the rate percent necessary to raise the amount of taxes levied for any
taxing district within the county shall be computed upon the assessed value of
the property of the district; all taxes assessed against any property shall be
added together and extended on the rolls in a column headed consolidated or
total tax. In extending any tax, whenever it amounts to a fractional part of a
cent greater than five mills it shall be made one cent, and whenever it amounts
to five mills or less than five mills it shall be dropped. The amount of all
taxes shall be entered in the proper columns, as shown by entering the rate
percent necessary to raise the consolidated or total tax and the total tax
assessed against the property.

(2) After entering
the amounts under subsection (1) of this section, the county assessor shall
compute the amount of credit authorized under section 1 of this act for each
parcel of property. The credit allowed for any property shall be extended on
the rolls in a column headed tax credit. The county treasurer shall subtract
the amount of the credit from the total tax and enter this amount in a column
headed tax payable.

(3) For the
purpose of computing the rate necessary to raise the amount of any excess levy
in a taxing district which has classified or designated forest land under
chapter 84.33 RCW, other than the state, the county assessor shall add the
district's timber assessed value, as defined in RCW 84.33.035, to the assessed
value of the property: PROVIDED, That for school districts maintenance and
operations levies only one-half of the district's timber assessed value or
eighty percent of the timber roll of such district in calendar year 1983 as
determined under chapter 84.33 RCW, whichever is greater, shall be added.

(((3))) (4)
Upon the completion of such tax extension, it shall be the duty of the county
assessor to make in each assessment book, tax roll or list a certificate in the
following form:

I,
. . . . . ., assessor of
. . . . . . county, state of Washington, do hereby
certify that the foregoing is a correct list of taxes levied on the real and
personal property in the county of . . . . . . for the
year ((one thousand nine hundred and))
. . . . . .

Witness my
hand this . . . . day of . . . . . .,
((19)). . . .

.................. ,
County Assessor

(((4))) (5)
The county assessor shall deliver said tax rolls to the county treasurer, on or
before the fifteenth day of January, taking receipt therefor, and at the same
time the county assessor shall provide the county auditor with an abstract of
the tax rolls showing the total amount of taxes collectible in each of the
taxing districts.

Sec. 3. RCW 84.56.050 and 1991 c
245 s 17 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) On receiving
the tax rolls the treasurer shall post all real and personal property taxes
from the rolls to the treasurer's tax roll, and shall carry forward to the
current tax rolls a memorandum of all delinquent taxes on each and every
description of property, and enter the same on the property upon which the
taxes are delinquent showing the amounts for each year. The treasurer shall
notify each taxpayer in the county, at the expense of the county, of the amount
of the real and personal property((,)) and the current and delinquent
amount of tax due on the same((; and)). The treasurer shall have
printed on the notice the name of each tax ((and)), the levy made
on the same, the amount of any credit under section 1 of this act, and the
tax payable. The state tax credit authorized in section 1 of this act shall be
credited against any state tax payable on the property. The county
treasurer shall be the sole collector of all delinquent taxes and all other
taxes due and collectible on the tax rolls of the county((: PROVIDED, That)).

(2) The term
"taxpayer" as used in this section shall mean any person charged, or
whose property is charged, with property tax; and the person to be notified is
that person whose name appears on the tax roll herein mentioned((:
PROVIDED, FURTHER, That)). If no name so appears the person to be
notified is that person shown by the treasurer's tax rolls or duplicate tax
receipts of any preceding year as the payer of the tax last paid on the
property in question.

Sec. 4. RCW 84.36.383 and 1999 c
358 s 18 are each amended to read as follows:

As used in RCW
84.36.381 through 84.36.389 and section 1 of this act, except where the
context clearly indicates a different meaning:

(1) The term
"residence" means a single family dwelling unit whether such unit be
separate or part of a multiunit dwelling, including the land on which such
dwelling stands not to exceed one acre. The term shall also include a share
ownership in a cooperative housing association, corporation, or partnership if
the person claiming exemption can establish that his or her share represents
the specific unit or portion of such structure in which he or she resides. The
term shall also include a single family dwelling situated upon lands the fee of
which is vested in the United States or any instrumentality thereof including
an Indian tribe or in the state of Washington, and notwithstanding the
provisions of RCW 84.04.080 and 84.04.090, such a residence shall be deemed
real property.

(2) The term "real
property" shall also include a mobile home which has substantially lost
its identity as a mobile unit by virtue of its being fixed in location upon
land owned or leased by the owner of the mobile home and placed on a foundation
(posts or blocks) with fixed pipe, connections with sewer, water, or other
utilities. A mobile home located on land leased by the owner of the mobile
home is subject, for tax billing, payment, and collection purposes, only to the
personal property provisions of chapter 84.56 RCW and RCW 84.60.040.

(3)
"Department" means the state department of revenue.

(4) "Combined
disposable income" means the disposable income of the person claiming the
exemption, plus the disposable income of his or her spouse, and the disposable
income of each cotenant occupying the residence for the assessment year, less
amounts paid by the person claiming the exemption or his or her spouse during
the assessment year for:

(a) Drugs supplied by
prescription of a medical practitioner authorized by the laws of this state or
another jurisdiction to issue prescriptions; and

(b) The treatment or
care of either person received in the home or in a nursing home.

(5) "Disposable income"
means adjusted gross income as defined in the federal internal revenue code, as
amended prior to January 1, 1989, or such subsequent date as the director may
provide by rule consistent with the purpose of this section, plus all of the
following items to the extent they are not included in or have been deducted
from adjusted gross income:

(a) Capital gains,
other than gain excluded from income under section 121 of the federal internal
revenue code to the extent it is reinvested in a new principal residence;

(b) Amounts deducted
for loss;

(c) Amounts deducted
for depreciation;

(d) Pension and annuity
receipts;

(e) Military pay and
benefits other than attendant-care and medical-aid payments;

(f) Veterans benefits
other than attendant-care and medical-aid payments;

(g) Federal social
security act and railroad retirement benefits;

(h) Dividend receipts;
and

(i) Interest received
on state and municipal bonds.

(6)
"Cotenant" means a person who resides with the person claiming the
exemption and who has an ownership interest in the residence.

Sec. 5. RCW 84.36.385 and 1992 c
206 s 13 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) A claim for
exemption under RCW 84.36.381 ((as now or hereafter amended,)) or a
credit under section 1 of this act shall be made and filed at any time
during the year for exemption or credit from taxes payable the following
year and thereafter and solely upon forms as prescribed ((and furnished))
by the department of revenue. However, an exemption from tax under RCW
84.36.381 shall continue for no more than four years unless a renewal
application is filed as provided in subsection (3) of this section. The county
assessor may also require, by written notice, a renewal application following
an amendment of the income requirements set forth in RCW 84.36.381. Renewal
applications shall be on forms prescribed and furnished by the department of
revenue. A credit under section 1 of this act shall continue each year as
long as the residence is eligible for credit.

(2) A person granted an
exemption under RCW 84.36.381 or a credit under section 1 of this act
shall inform the county assessor of any change in status affecting ((the
person's)) entitlement to the exemption or credit on forms
prescribed and furnished by the department of revenue.

(3) Each person exempt
from taxes under RCW 84.36.381 in 1993 and thereafter, shall file with the
county assessor a renewal application not later than December 31 of the year
the assessor notifies such person of the requirement to file the renewal
application.

(4) Beginning in 1992
and in each of the three succeeding years, the county assessor shall notify
approximately one-fourth of those persons exempt from taxes under RCW 84.36.381
in the current year who have not filed a renewal application within the
previous four years, of the requirement to file a renewal application.

(5) If the assessor
finds that the applicant does not meet the qualifications as set forth in RCW
84.36.381((, as now or hereafter amended)) or section 1 of this act,
the claim or exemption shall be denied but such denial shall be subject to
appeal under the provisions of RCW 84.48.010(5). If the applicant had received
exemption or credit in prior years based on erroneous information, the
taxes shall be collected subject to penalties as provided in RCW 84.40.130 for
a period of not to exceed three years.

(6) The department and
each local assessor is hereby directed to publicize the qualifications and
manner of making claims under RCW 84.36.381 through 84.36.389 and section 1
of this act, through communications media, including such paid
advertisements or notices as it deems appropriate. Notice of the
qualifications, method of making applications, the penalties for not reporting
a change in status, and availability of further information shall be included
on or with property tax statements and revaluation notices for all residential
property including mobile homes, except rental properties.

Sec. 6. RCW 84.36.387 and 1992 c
206 s 14 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) All claims for
exemption under RCW 84.36.381 or a credit under section 1 of this act
shall be made and signed by the person entitled to the exemption or credit,
by his or her attorney in fact or in the event the residence of such person is
under mortgage or purchase contract requiring accumulation of reserves out of
which the holder of the mortgage or contract is required to pay real estate taxes,
by such holder or by the owner, either before two witnesses or the county
assessor or his or her deputy in the county where the real property is
located: PROVIDED, That if a claim for exemption or credit is made by a
person living in a cooperative housing association, corporation, or
partnership, such claim shall be made and signed by the person entitled to the
exemption or credit and by the authorized agent of such cooperative.

(2) If the taxpayer is
unable to submit his or her own claim, the claim shall be submitted by a
duly authorized agent or by a guardian or other person charged with the care of
the person or property of such taxpayer.

(3) All claims for
exemption and renewal applications under RCW 84.36.381 shall be
accompanied by such documented verification of income as shall be prescribed by
rule adopted by the department of revenue.

(4) Any person signing
a false claim with the intent to defraud or evade the payment of any tax shall
be guilty of the offense of perjury.

(5) The tax liability
of a cooperative housing association, corporation, or partnership shall be
reduced by the amount of tax exemption or credit to which a claimant
residing therein is entitled and such cooperative shall reduce any amount owed
by the claimant to the cooperative by such exact amount of tax exemption or
credit or, if no amount be owed, the cooperative shall make payment to the
claimant of such exact amount of exemption or credit.

(6) A remainderman or
other person who would have otherwise paid the tax on real property that is the
subject of an exemption granted under RCW 84.36.381 or a credit granted
under section 1 of this act for an estate for life shall reduce the amount
which would have been payable by the life tenant to the remainderman or other
person to the extent of the exemption or credit. If no amount is owed
or separately stated as an obligation between these persons, the remainderman
or other person shall make payment to the life tenant in the exact amount of
the exemption or credit.

Sec. 7. RCW 84.36.389 and 1979
ex.s. c 214 s 4 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) The director of the
department of revenue shall adopt such rules ((and regulations)) and
prescribe such forms as may be necessary and appropriate for implementation and
administration of this chapter subject to chapter 34.05 RCW, the administrative
procedure act.

(2) The department may
conduct such audits of the administration of RCW 84.36.381 through 84.36.389 and
section 1 of this act and the claims for exemption or credit filed
thereunder as it considers necessary. The powers of the department under
chapter 84.08 RCW apply to these audits.

(3) Any information or
facts concerning confidential income data obtained by the assessor or the
department, or their agents or employees, under subsection (2) of this section
shall be used only to administer RCW 84.36.381 through 84.36.389.
Notwithstanding any provision of law to the contrary, absent written consent by
the person about whom the information or facts have been obtained, the
confidential income data shall not be disclosed by the assessor or the
assessor's agents or employees to anyone other than the department or the
department's agents or employees nor by the department or the department's
agents or employees to anyone other than the assessor or the assessor's agents
or employees except in a judicial proceeding pertaining to the taxpayer's
entitlement to the tax exemption under RCW 84.36.381 through 84.36.389 or
credit under section 1 of this act. Any violation of this subsection is a
misdemeanor.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
8. This act applies to taxes
levied for collection in 2002 and thereafter.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 9. This act takes effect
when the proposed amendment to Article VII of the state Constitution providing
tax credits for owner-occupied residential housing (HJR ....) (H-1451/01) is
validly submitted to and approved by the voters at a general election held in
November 2001. If the proposed amendment is not approved, this act is null and
void in its entirety.

---
END ---