BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF
WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1. RCW 35.58.200 and 1975 c
36 s 1 are each amended to read as follows:

If a metropolitan
municipal corporation shall be authorized to perform the function of
metropolitan water pollution abatement, it shall have the following powers in
addition to the general powers granted by this chapter:

(1) To prepare a
comprehensive water pollution abatement plan including provisions for
waterborne pollutant removal, water quality improvement, sewage disposal, and
storm water drainage for the metropolitan area.

(2) To acquire by purchase,
condemnation, gift, or grant and to lease, construct, add to, improve, replace,
repair, maintain, operate and regulate the use of metropolitan facilities for
water pollution abatement, including but not limited to, removal of waterborne
pollutants, water quality improvement, sewage disposal and storm water drainage
within or without the metropolitan area, including but not limited to trunk,
interceptor and outfall sewers, whether used to carry sanitary waste, storm
water, or combined storm and sanitary sewage, lift and pumping stations,
pipelines, drains, sewage treatment plants, flow control structures together
with all lands, property rights, equipment and accessories necessary for such
facilities. Storm water drainage facilities include natural systems, such
as wetland areas, that collect or filter storm water. Sewer facilities
which are owned by a county, city, or special district may be acquired or used
by the metropolitan municipal corporation only with the consent of the
legislative body of the county, city, or special districts owning such
facilities. Counties, cities, and special districts are hereby authorized to
convey or lease such facilities to metropolitan municipal corporations or to
contract for their joint use on such terms as may be fixed by agreement between
the legislative body of such county, city, or special district and the
metropolitan council, without submitting the matter to the voters of such
county, city, or district.

(3) To require
counties, cities, special districts and other political subdivisions to
discharge sewage collected by such entities from any portion of the
metropolitan area which can drain by gravity flow into such metropolitan
facilities as may be provided to serve such areas when the metropolitan council
shall declare by resolution that the health, safety, or welfare of the people
within the metropolitan area requires such action.

(4) To fix rates and
charges for the use of metropolitan water pollution abatement facilities, and
to expend the moneys so collected for authorized water pollution abatement
activities.

(5) To establish
minimum standards for the construction of local water pollution abatement
facilities and to approve plans for construction of such facilities by
component counties or cities or by special districts, which are connected to
the facilities of the metropolitan municipal corporation. No such county,
city, or special district shall construct such facilities without first
securing such approval.

(6) To acquire by
purchase, condemnation, gift, or grant, to lease, construct, add to, improve,
replace, repair, maintain, operate and regulate the use of facilities for the
local collection of sewage or storm water in portions of the metropolitan area
not contained within any city or special district operating local public sewer
facilities and, with the consent of the legislative body of any such city or
special district, to exercise such powers within such city or special district
and for such purpose to have all the powers conferred by law upon such city or
special district with respect to such local collection facilities: PROVIDED,
That such consent shall not be required if the department of ecology certifies
that a water pollution problem exists within any such city or special district
and notifies the city or special district to correct such problem and
corrective construction of necessary local collection facilities shall not have
been commenced within one year after notification. All costs of such local
collection facilities shall be paid for by the area served thereby.

(7) To participate
fully in federal and state programs under the federal water pollution control
act (86 Stat. 816 et seq., 33 U.S.C. 1251 et seq.) and to take all actions
necessary to secure to itself or its component agencies the benefits of that
act and to meet the requirements of that act, including but not limited to the
following:

(a) authority to
develop and implement such plans as may be appropriate or necessary under the
act.

(b) authority to
require by appropriate regulations that its component agencies comply with all
effluent treatment and limitation requirements, standards of performance
requirements, pretreatment requirements, a user charge and industrial cost
recovery system conforming to federal regulation, and all conditions of
national permit discharge elimination system permits issued to the metropolitan
municipal corporation or its component agencies. Adoption of such regulations
and compliance therewith shall not constitute a breach of any sewage disposal
contract between a metropolitan municipal corporation and its component
agencies nor a defense to an action for the performance of all terms and
conditions of such contracts not inconsistent with such regulations and such
contracts, as modified by such regulations, shall be in all respects valid and
enforceable.

Sec. 2. RCW 35.67.010 and 1997 c
447 s 7 are each amended to read as follows:

A "system of
sewerage" means and may include any or all of the following:

(1) Sanitary sewage
collection, treatment, and/or disposal facilities and services, on-site or
off-site sanitary sewerage facilities, inspection services and maintenance
services for public or private on-site systems, or any other means of sewage
treatment and disposal approved by the city;

(2) Combined sanitary
sewage disposal and storm or surface water sewers;

(3) Storm or surface
water sewers, including natural systems, such as wetland areas, that collect
or filter storm or surface water;

(4) Outfalls for storm
drainage or sanitary sewage and works, plants, and facilities for storm
drainage or sanitary sewage treatment and disposal, and rights and interests in
property relating to the system;

(5) Combined water and
sewerage systems;

(6) Point and nonpoint
water pollution monitoring programs that are directly related to the sewerage
facilities and programs operated by a city or town;

(7) Public restroom and
sanitary facilities; and

(8) Any combination of
or part of any or all of such facilities.

The words
"public utility" when used in this chapter has the same meaning as
the words "system of sewerage."

Sec. 3. RCW 35.92.020 and 1997 c
447 s 9 are each amended to read as follows:

A city or town may
construct, condemn and purchase, purchase, acquire, add to, alter, maintain,
and operate systems, plants, sites, or other facilities of sewerage as defined
in RCW 35.67.010, or solid waste handling as defined by RCW 70.95.030, and
shall have full authority to manage, regulate, operate, control, and to fix the
price of service and facilities of those systems, plants, sites, or other
facilities within and without the limits of the city or town. Storm water
sewerage systems or facilities include natural areas, such as wetlands, that
collect or filter storm water. The rates charged shall be uniform for the
same class of customers or service and facilities. In classifying customers
served or service and facilities furnished by a system or systems of sewerage,
the legislative authority of the city or town may in its discretion consider
any or all of the following factors: (1) The difference in cost of service and
facilities to customers; (2) the location of customers within and without the
city or town; (3) the difference in cost of maintenance, operation, repair, and
replacement of the parts of the system; (4) the different character of the
service and facilities furnished to customers; (5) the quantity and quality of
the sewage delivered and the time of its delivery; (6) capital contributions
made to the systems, plants, sites, or other facilities, including but not
limited to, assessments; (7) the nonprofit public benefit status, as defined in
RCW 24.03.490, of the land user; and (8) any other factors that present a reasonable
difference as a ground for distinction. Rates or charges for on-site
inspection and maintenance services may not be imposed under this chapter on
the development, construction, or reconstruction of property.

A city or town may
provide assistance to aid low-income persons in connection with services
provided under this chapter.

Under this chapter,
after July 1, 1998, any requirements for pumping the septic tank of an on-site
sewage system should be based, among other things, on actual measurement of
accumulation of sludge and scum by a trained inspector, trained owner's agent,
or trained owner. Training must occur in a program approved by the state board
of health or by a local health officer.

Before adopting on-site
inspection and maintenance utility services, or incorporating residences into
an on-site inspection and maintenance or sewer utility under this chapter,
notification must be provided, prior to the applicable public hearing, to all
residences within the proposed service area that have on-site systems permitted
by the local health officer. The notice must clearly state that the residence
is within the proposed service area and must provide information on estimated
rates or charges that may be imposed for the service.

A city or
town shall not provide on-site sewage system inspection, pumping services, or
other maintenance or repair services under this section using city or town
employees unless the on-site system is connected by a publicly owned collection
system to the city or town's sewerage system, and the on-site system represents
the first step in the sewage disposal process. Nothing in this section shall
affect the authority of state or local health officers to carry out their
responsibilities under any other applicable law.

Sec. 4. RCW 36.36.010 and 1991 c
151 s 1 are each amended to read as follows:

The protection of
subterranean water from pollution or degradation is of great concern. The
depletion of subterranean water is of great concern. The purpose of this
chapter is to allow the creation of aquifer protection areas to finance the
protection, preservation, and rehabilitation of subterranean water,
including natural systems such as wetlands that filter surface or storm water
prior to recharge into the ground, and to reduce special assessments
imposed upon households to finance facilities for such purposes. Pollution and
degradation of subterranean drinking water supplies, and the depletion of
subterranean drinking water supplies, pose immediate threats to the safety and
welfare of the citizens of this state.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
5. A new section is added
to chapter 36.89 RCW to read as follows:

Storm water control
facilities include natural systems, such as wetlands, that collect or filter
storm water.

Sec. 6. RCW 36.94.010 and 1997 c
447 s 10 are each amended to read as follows:

As used in this
chapter:

(1) A "system of
sewerage" means and may include any or all of the following:

(a) Sanitary sewage
collection, treatment, and/or disposal facilities and services, including
without limitation on-site or off-site sanitary sewerage facilities, inspection
services and maintenance services for private or public on-site systems, or any
other means of sewage treatment and disposal approved by the county;

(b) Combined sanitary
sewage disposal and storm or surface water drains and facilities;

(c) Storm or surface
water drains, channels, and facilities, including natural systems such as
wetlands that collect or filter storm or surface water;

(d) Outfalls for storm
drainage or sanitary sewage and works, plants, and facilities for storm
drainage or sanitary sewage treatment and disposal, and rights and interests in
property relating to the system;

(e) Combined water and
sewerage systems;

(f) Point and nonpoint
water pollution monitoring programs that are directly related to the sewerage
facilities and programs operated by a county;

(g) Public restroom and
sanitary facilities;

(h) The facilities and
services authorized in RCW 36.94.020; and

(i) Any combination of
or part of any or all of such facilities.

(2) A "system of
water" means and includes:

(a) A water
distribution system, including dams, reservoirs, aqueducts, plants, pumping
stations, transmission and lateral distribution lines and other facilities for
distribution of water;

(b) A combined water
and sewerage system;

(c) Any combination of
or any part of any or all of such facilities.

(3) A "sewerage
and/or water general plan" means a general plan for a system of sewerage
and/or water for the county which shall be an element of the comprehensive plan
established by the county pursuant to RCW 36.70.350(6) and/or chapter 35.63
RCW, if there is such a comprehensive plan.

(a) A sewerage general
plan shall include the general location and description of treatment and
disposal facilities, trunk and interceptor sewers, pumping stations, monitoring
and control facilities, channels, local service areas and a general description
of the collection system to serve those areas, a description of on-site
sanitary sewerage system inspection services and maintenance services, and
other facilities and services as may be required to provide a functional and
implementable plan, including preliminary engineering to assure feasibility.
The plan may also include a description of the regulations deemed appropriate
to carrying out surface drainage plans.

(b) A water general
plan shall include the general location and description of water resources to
be utilized, wells, treatment facilities, transmission lines, storage
reservoirs, pumping stations, and monitoring and control facilities as may be
required to provide a functional and implementable plan.

(c) Water and/or sewerage
general plans shall include preliminary engineering in adequate detail to
assure technical feasibility and, to the extent then known, shall further
discuss the methods of distributing the cost and expense of the system and
shall indicate the economic feasibility of plan implementation. The plans may
also specify local or lateral facilities and services. The sewerage and/or
water general plan does not mean the final engineering construction or
financing plans for the system.

(4) "Municipal
corporation" means and includes any city, town, metropolitan municipal
corporation, any public utility district which operates and maintains a sewer
or water system, any sewer, water, diking, or drainage district, any diking,
drainage, and sewerage improvement district, and any irrigation district.

(5) A "private
utility" means and includes all utilities, both public and private, which
provide sewerage and/or water service and which are not municipal corporations
within the definition of this chapter. The ownership of a private utility may
be in a corporation, nonprofit or for profit, in a cooperative association, in
a mutual organization, or in individuals.

(6) "Board"
means one or more boards of county commissioners and/or the legislative
authority of a home rule charter county.

Sec. 7. RCW 43.155.020 and 1996
c 168 s 2 are each amended to read as follows:

Unless the context
clearly requires otherwise, the definitions in this section shall apply
throughout this chapter.

(1) "Board"
means the public works board created in RCW 43.155.030.

(2)
"Department" means the department of community, trade, and economic
development.

(3) "Financing
guarantees" means the pledge of money in the public works assistance
account, or money to be received by the public works assistance account, to the
repayment of all or a portion of the principal of or interest on obligations
issued by local governments to finance public works projects.

(4) "Local
governments" means cities, towns, counties, special purpose districts, and
any other municipal corporations or quasi-municipal corporations in the state
excluding school districts and port districts.

(5) "Public works
project" means a project of a local government for the planning,
acquisition, construction, repair, reconstruction, replacement, rehabilitation,
or improvement of streets and roads, bridges, water systems, or storm and
sanitary sewage systems and solid waste facilities, including recycling
facilities and natural systems such as wetlands that collect or filter storm
water.

(6) "Solid waste
or recycling project" means remedial actions necessary to bring abandoned
or closed landfills into compliance with regulatory requirements and the
repair, restoration, and replacement of existing solid waste transfer,
recycling facilities, and landfill projects limited to the opening of landfill
cells that are in existing and permitted landfills.

(7) "Technical
assistance" means training and other services provided to local
governments to: (a) Help such local governments plan, apply, and qualify for
loans and financing guarantees from the board, and (b) help local governments
improve their ability to plan for, finance, acquire, construct, repair,
replace, rehabilitate, and maintain public facilities.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
8. A new section is added
to chapter 54.16 RCW to read as follows:

A public utility
district may acquire natural systems such as wetlands that collect or filter
storm water as part of any district operation of a facility or system of storm
water or surface water sewerage, or any district operation of a facility or
system that controls and protects, preserves, and rehabilitates surface and
underground waters.

Sec. 9. RCW 57.08.005 and 1999 c
153 s 2 are each amended to read as follows:

A water-sewer
district shall have the following powers:

(1) To acquire by
purchase or condemnation, or both, all lands, property and property rights, and
all water and water rights, both within and without the district, necessary for
its purposes. The right of eminent domain shall be exercised in the same
manner and by the same procedure as provided for cities and towns, insofar as
consistent with this title, except that all assessment or reassessment rolls to
be prepared and filed by eminent domain commissioners or commissioners
appointed by the court shall be prepared and filed by the district, and the
duties devolving upon the city treasurer are imposed upon the county treasurer;

(2) To lease real or
personal property necessary for its purposes for a term of years for which that
leased property may reasonably be needed;

(3) To construct,
condemn and purchase, add to, maintain, and supply waterworks to furnish the
district and inhabitants thereof and any other persons, both within and without
the district, with an ample supply of water for all uses and purposes public
and private with full authority to regulate and control the use, content,
distribution, and price thereof in such a manner as is not in conflict with
general law and may construct, acquire, or own buildings and other necessary
district facilities. Where a customer connected to the district's system uses
the water on an intermittent or transient basis, a district may charge for
providing water service to such a customer, regardless of the amount of water,
if any, used by the customer. District waterworks may include facilities which
result in combined water supply and electric generation, if the electricity
generated thereby is a byproduct of the water supply system. That electricity
may be used by the district or sold to any entity authorized by law to use or
distribute electricity. Electricity is deemed a byproduct when the electrical
generation is subordinate to the primary purpose of water supply. For such
purposes, a district may take, condemn and purchase, acquire, and retain water
from any public or navigable lake, river or watercourse, or any underflowing
water, and by means of aqueducts or pipeline conduct the same throughout the
district and any city or town therein and carry it along and upon public
highways, roads, and streets, within and without such district. For the
purpose of constructing or laying aqueducts or pipelines, dams, or waterworks
or other necessary structures in storing and retaining water or for any other
lawful purpose such district may occupy the beds and shores up to the high
water mark of any such lake, river, or other watercourse, and may acquire by
purchase or condemnation such property or property rights or privileges as may
be necessary to protect its water supply from pollution. For the purposes of
waterworks which include facilities for the generation of electricity as a
byproduct, nothing in this section may be construed to authorize a district to
condemn electric generating, transmission, or distribution rights or facilities
of entities authorized by law to distribute electricity, or to acquire such
rights or facilities without the consent of the owner;

(4) To purchase and
take water from any municipal corporation, private person, or entity. A
district contiguous to Canada may contract with a Canadian corporation for the
purchase of water and for the construction, purchase, maintenance, and supply
of waterworks to furnish the district and inhabitants thereof and residents of
Canada with an ample supply of water under the terms approved by the board of
commissioners;

(5) To construct,
condemn and purchase, add to, maintain, and operate systems of sewers for the
purpose of furnishing the district, the inhabitants thereof, and persons outside
the district with an adequate system of sewers for all uses and purposes,
public and private, including but not limited to on-site sewage disposal
facilities, approved septic tanks or approved septic tank systems, on-site
sanitary sewerage systems, inspection services and maintenance services for
private and public on-site systems, point and nonpoint water pollution
monitoring programs that are directly related to the sewerage facilities and
programs operated by a district, other facilities, programs, and systems for
the collection, interception, treatment, and disposal of wastewater, and for
the control of pollution from wastewater with full authority to regulate the
use and operation thereof and the service rates to be charged. Under this
chapter, after July 1, 1998, any requirements for pumping the septic tank of an
on-site sewage system should be based, among other things, on actual
measurement of accumulation of sludge and scum by a trained inspector, trained
owner's agent, or trained owner. Training must occur in a program approved by
the state board of health or by a local health officer. Sewage facilities may
include facilities which result in combined sewage disposal or treatment and
electric generation, except that the electricity generated thereby is a
byproduct of the system of sewers. Such electricity may be used by the
district or sold to any entity authorized by law to distribute electricity.
Electricity is deemed a byproduct when the electrical generation is subordinate
to the primary purpose of sewage disposal or treatment. For such purposes a
district may conduct sewage throughout the district and throughout other
political subdivisions within the district, and construct and lay sewer pipe
along and upon public highways, roads, and streets, within and without the
district, and condemn and purchase or acquire land and rights of way necessary
for such sewer pipe. A district may erect sewage treatment plants within or
without the district, and may acquire, by purchase or condemnation, properties
or privileges necessary to be had to protect any lakes, rivers, or watercourses
and also other areas of land from pollution from its sewers or its sewage
treatment plant. For the purposes of sewage facilities which include
facilities that result in combined sewage disposal or treatment and electric
generation where the electric generation is a byproduct, nothing in this
section may be construed to authorize a district to condemn electric
generating, transmission, or distribution rights or facilities of entities
authorized by law to distribute electricity, or to acquire such rights or
facilities without the consent of the owners;

(6) To construct,
condemn and purchase, add to, maintain, and operate systems of drainage for the
benefit and use of the district, the inhabitants thereof, and persons outside
the district with an adequate system of drainage, including but not limited to
facilities and systems for the collection, interception, treatment, and
disposal of storm or surface waters, and for the protection, preservation, and
rehabilitation of surface and underground waters, including natural systems,
such as wetland areas, that collect or filter storm or surface water, and
drainage facilities for public highways, streets, and roads, with full authority
to regulate the use and operation thereof and the service rates to be charged.
Drainage facilities may include natural systems. Drainage facilities may
include facilities which result in combined drainage facilities and electric
generation, except that the electricity generated thereby is a byproduct of the
drainage system. Such electricity may be used by the district or sold to any
entity authorized by law to distribute electricity. Electricity is deemed a
byproduct when the electrical generation is subordinate to the primary purpose
of drainage collection, disposal, and treatment. For such purposes, a district
may conduct storm or surface water throughout the district and throughout other
political subdivisions within the district, construct and lay drainage pipe and
culverts along and upon public highways, roads, and streets, within and without
the district, and condemn and purchase or acquire land and rights of way
necessary for such drainage systems. A district may provide or erect facilities
and improvements for the treatment and disposal of storm or surface water
within or without the district, and may acquire, by purchase or condemnation,
properties or privileges necessary to be had to protect any lakes, rivers, or
watercourses and also other areas of land from pollution from storm or surface
waters. For the purposes of drainage facilities which include facilities that
also generate electricity as a byproduct, nothing in this section may be
construed to authorize a district to condemn electric generating, transmission,
or distribution rights or facilities of entities authorized by law to
distribute electricity, or to acquire such rights or facilities without the
consent of the owners;

(7) To construct,
condemn, acquire, and own buildings and other necessary district facilities;

(8) To compel all
property owners within the district located within an area served by the
district's system of sewers to connect their private drain and sewer systems
with the district's system under such penalty as the commissioners shall
prescribe by resolution. The district may for such purpose enter upon private
property and connect the private drains or sewers with the district system and
the cost thereof shall be charged against the property owner and shall be a
lien upon property served;

(9) Where a district
contains within its borders, abuts, or is located adjacent to any lake, stream,
ground water as defined by RCW 90.44.035, or other waterway within the state of
Washington, to provide for the reduction, minimization, or elimination of
pollutants from those waters in accordance with the district's comprehensive
plan, and to issue general obligation bonds, revenue bonds, local improvement
district bonds, or utility local improvement bonds for the purpose of paying
all or any part of the cost of reducing, minimizing, or eliminating the
pollutants from these waters;

(10) To fix rates and
charges for water, sewer, and drain service supplied and to charge property
owners seeking to connect to the district's systems, as a condition to granting
the right to so connect, in addition to the cost of the connection, such
reasonable connection charge as the board of commissioners shall determine to
be proper in order that those property owners shall bear their equitable share
of the cost of the system. For the purposes of calculating a connection
charge, the board of commissioners shall determine the pro rata share of the
cost of existing facilities and facilities planned for construction within the
next ten years and contained in an adopted comprehensive plan and other costs
borne by the district which are directly attributable to the improvements
required by property owners seeking to connect to the system. The cost of
existing facilities shall not include those portions of the system which have
been donated or which have been paid for by grants. The connection charge may
include interest charges applied from the date of construction of the system
until the connection, or for a period not to exceed ten years, whichever is
shorter, at a rate commensurate with the rate of interest applicable to the
district at the time of construction or major rehabilitation of the system, or
at the time of installation of the lines to which the property owner is seeking
to connect. A district may permit payment of the cost of connection and the
reasonable connection charge to be paid with interest in installments over a
period not exceeding fifteen years. The county treasurer may charge and
collect a fee of three dollars for each year for the treasurer's services.
Those fees shall be a charge to be included as part of each annual installment,
and shall be credited to the county current expense fund by the county
treasurer. Revenues from connection charges excluding permit fees are to be
considered payments in aid of construction as defined by department of revenue
rule. Rates or charges for on-site inspection and maintenance services may not
be imposed under this chapter on the development, construction, or
reconstruction of property.

Before adopting on-site
inspection and maintenance utility services, or incorporating residences into
an on-site inspection and maintenance or sewer utility under this chapter,
notification must be provided, prior to the applicable public hearing, to all
residences within the proposed service area that have on-site systems permitted
by the local health officer. The notice must clearly state that the residence
is within the proposed service area and must provide information on estimated
rates or charges that may be imposed for the service.

A water-sewer district
shall not provide on-site sewage system inspection, pumping services, or other
maintenance or repair services under this section using water-sewer district
employees unless the on-site system is connected by a publicly owned collection
system to the water-sewer district's sewerage system, and the on-site system
represents the first step in the sewage disposal process.

Except as otherwise
provided in RCW 90.03.525, any public entity and public property, including the
state of Washington and state property, shall be subject to rates and charges
for sewer, water, storm water control, drainage, and street lighting facilities
to the same extent private persons and private property are subject to those
rates and charges that are imposed by districts. In setting those rates and
charges, consideration may be made of in-kind services, such as stream
improvements or donation of property;

(11) To contract with
individuals, associations and corporations, the state of Washington, and the
United States;

(12) To employ such
persons as are needed to carry out the district's purposes and fix salaries and
any bond requirements for those employees;

(13) To contract for
the provision of engineering, legal, and other professional services as in the
board of commissioner's discretion is necessary in carrying out their duties;

(14) To sue and be
sued;

(15) To loan and borrow
funds and to issue bonds and instruments evidencing indebtedness under chapter
57.20 RCW and other applicable laws;

(16) To transfer funds,
real or personal property, property interests, or services subject to RCW
57.08.015;

(17) To levy taxes in
accordance with this chapter and chapters 57.04 and 57.20 RCW;

(18) To provide for
making local improvements and to levy and collect special assessments on
property benefitted thereby, and for paying for the same or any portion thereof
in accordance with chapter 57.16 RCW;

(19) To establish
street lighting systems under RCW 57.08.060;

(20) To exercise such
other powers as are granted to water-sewer districts by this title or other
applicable laws; and

(21) To exercise any of
the powers granted to cities and counties with respect to the acquisition,
construction, maintenance, operation of, and fixing rates and charges for
waterworks and systems of sewerage and drainage.

Sec. 10. RCW 70.146.020 and 1995
2nd sp.s. c 18 s 920 are each amended to read as follows:

Unless the context
clearly requires otherwise, the definitions in this section apply throughout
this chapter.

(1) "Account"
means the water quality account in the state treasury.

(2)
"Department" means the department of ecology.

(3) "Eligible
cost" means the cost of that portion of a water pollution control facility
that can be financed under this chapter excluding any portion of a facility's
cost attributable to capacity that is in excess of that reasonably required to
address one hundred ten percent of the applicant's needs for water pollution
control existing at the time application is submitted for assistance under this
chapter.

(4) "Water
pollution control facility" or "facilities" means any facilities
or systems for the control, collection, storage, treatment, disposal, or
recycling of wastewater, including but not limited to sanitary sewage, storm
water, residential, commercial, industrial, and agricultural wastes, which are
causing water quality degradation due to concentrations of conventional,
nonconventional, or toxic pollutants. Water pollution control facilities
include all equipment, utilities, structures, real property, and interests in
and improvements on real property necessary for or incidental to such purpose,
including natural areas such as wetlands that collect or filter storm water.
Water pollution control facilities also include such facilities, equipment, and
collection systems as are necessary to protect federally designated sole source
aquifers.

(5) "Water
pollution control activities" means actions taken by a public body for the
following purposes: (a) To prevent or mitigate pollution of underground water;
(b) to control nonpoint sources of water pollution; (c) to restore the water
quality of fresh water lakes; and (d) to maintain or improve water quality
through the use of water pollution control facilities or other means,
including the use of natural systems such as wetlands that collect or filter
storm water. During the 1995-1997 fiscal biennium, "water pollution
control activities" includes activities by state agencies to protect public
drinking water supplies and sources.

(6) "Public
body" means the state of Washington or any agency, county, city or town,
conservation district, other political subdivision, municipal corporation,
quasi-municipal corporation, and those Indian tribes now or hereafter
recognized as such by the federal government.

(7) "Water
pollution" means such contamination, or other alteration of the physical,
chemical, or biological properties of any waters of the state, including change
in temperature, taste, color, turbidity, or odor of the waters, or such
discharge of any liquid, gaseous, solid, radioactive, or other substance into
any waters of the state as will or is likely to create a nuisance or render
such waters harmful, detrimental, or injurious to the public health, safety, or
welfare, or to domestic, commercial, industrial, agricultural, recreational, or
other legitimate beneficial uses, or to livestock, wild animals, birds, fish,
or other aquatic life.

(8) "Nonpoint
source water pollution" means pollution that enters any waters of the
state from any dispersed water-based or land-use activities, including, but not
limited to, atmospheric deposition, surface water runoff from agricultural
lands, urban areas, and forest lands, subsurface or underground sources, and
discharges from boats or other marine vessels.

(9) "Sole source
aquifer" means the sole or principal source of public drinking water for
an area designated by the administrator of the environmental protection agency
pursuant to Public Law 93-523, Sec. 1424(b).

Sec. 11. RCW 82.46.010 and 1994 c
272 s 1 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) The legislative
authority of any county or city shall identify in the adopted budget the
capital projects funded in whole or in part from the proceeds of the tax
authorized in this section, and shall indicate that such tax is intended to be
in addition to other funds that may be reasonably available for such capital
projects.

(2) The legislative
authority of any county or any city may impose an excise tax on each sale of
real property in the unincorporated areas of the county for the county tax and
in the corporate limits of the city for the city tax at a rate not exceeding
one-quarter of one percent of the selling price. The revenues from this tax
shall be used by any city or county with a population of five thousand or less
and any city or county that does not plan under RCW 36.70A.040 for any capital
purpose identified in a capital improvements plan and local capital
improvements, including those listed in RCW 35.43.040.

After April 30, 1992,
revenues generated from the tax imposed under this subsection in counties over
five thousand population and cities over five thousand population that are
required or choose to plan under RCW 36.70A.040 shall be used solely for
financing capital projects specified in a capital facilities plan element of a
comprehensive plan and housing relocation assistance under RCW 59.18.440 and
59.18.450. However, revenues (a) pledged by such counties and cities to debt
retirement prior to April 30, 1992, may continue to be used for that purpose
until the original debt for which the revenues were pledged is retired, or (b)
committed prior to April 30, 1992, by such counties or cities to a project may
continue to be used for that purpose until the project is completed.

(3) In lieu of imposing
the tax authorized in RCW 82.14.030(2), the legislative authority of any county
or any city may impose an additional excise tax on each sale of real property
in the unincorporated areas of the county for the county tax and in the
corporate limits of the city for the city tax at a rate not exceeding one-half
of one percent of the selling price.

(4) Taxes imposed under
this section shall be collected from persons who are taxable by the state under
chapter 82.45 RCW upon the occurrence of any taxable event within the
unincorporated areas of the county or within the corporate limits of the city,
as the case may be.

(5) Taxes imposed under
this section shall comply with all applicable rules, regulations, laws, and
court decisions regarding real estate excise taxes as imposed by the state
under chapter 82.45 RCW.

(6) As used in this
section, "city" means any city or town and "capital
project" means those public works projects of a local government for
planning, acquisition, construction, reconstruction, repair, replacement,
rehabilitation, or improvement of streets; roads; highways; sidewalks; street
and road lighting systems; traffic signals; bridges; domestic water systems;
storm and sanitary sewer systems, including natural systems such as wetlands
that collect or filter storm water; parks; recreational facilities; law
enforcement facilities; fire protection facilities; trails; libraries;
administrative and/or judicial facilities; river and/or waterway flood control
projects by those jurisdictions that, prior to June 11, 1992, have expended
funds derived from the tax authorized by this section for such purposes; and,
until December 31, 1995, housing projects for those jurisdictions that, prior
to June 11, 1992, have expended or committed to expend funds derived from the
tax authorized by this section or the tax authorized by RCW 82.46.035 for such
purposes.

Sec. 12. RCW 82.46.035 and 1992 c
221 s 3 and 1991 sp.s. c 32 s 33 are each reenacted and amended to read as
follows:

(1) The legislative
authority of any county or city shall identify in the adopted budget the
capital projects funded in whole or in part from the proceeds of the tax
authorized in this section, and shall indicate that such tax is intended to be
in addition to other funds that may be reasonably available for such capital
projects.

(2) The legislative
authority of any county or any city that plans under RCW 36.70A.040(1) may
impose an additional excise tax on each sale of real property in the
unincorporated areas of the county for the county tax and in the corporate
limits of the city for the city tax at a rate not exceeding one-quarter of one
percent of the selling price. Any county choosing to plan under RCW
36.70A.040(2) and any city within such a county may only adopt an ordinance
imposing the excise tax authorized by this section if the ordinance is first
authorized by a proposition approved by a majority of the voters of the taxing
district voting on the proposition at a general election held within the
district or at a special election within the taxing district called by the
district for the purpose of submitting such proposition to the voters.

(3) Revenues generated
from the tax imposed under subsection (2) of this section shall be used by such
counties and cities solely for financing capital projects specified in a
capital facilities plan element of a comprehensive plan. However, revenues (a)
pledged by such counties and cities to debt retirement prior to March 1, 1992,
may continue to be used for that purpose until the original debt for which the
revenues were pledged is retired, or (b) committed prior to March 1, 1992, by
such counties or cities to a project may continue to be used for that purpose
until the project is completed.

(4) Revenues generated
by the tax imposed by this section shall be deposited in a separate account.

(5) As used in this
section, "city" means any city or town and "capital
project" means those public works projects of a local government for
planning, acquisition, construction, reconstruction, repair, replacement,
rehabilitation, or improvement of streets, roads, highways, sidewalks, street
and road lighting systems, traffic signals, bridges, domestic water systems,
storm and sanitary sewer systems, including natural areas such as wetlands
that collect or filter storm water, and planning, construction,
reconstruction, repair, rehabilitation, or improvement of parks.

(6) When the governor
files a notice of noncompliance under RCW 36.70A.340 with the secretary of
state and the appropriate county or city, the county or city's authority to
impose the additional excise tax under this section shall be temporarily
rescinded until the governor files a subsequent notice rescinding the notice of
noncompliance.

Sec. 13. RCW 90.72.030 and 1992 c
100 s 2 are each amended to read as follows:

The
legislative authority of each county having shellfish tidelands within its
boundaries is authorized to establish a shellfish protection district to
include areas in which nonpoint pollution threatens the water quality upon
which the continuation or restoration of shellfish farming or harvesting is
dependent. The legislative authority shall constitute the governing body of
the district and shall adopt a shellfish protection program to be effective
within the district. The legislative authority may appoint a local advisory
council to advise the legislative authority in preparation and implementation
of shellfish protection programs. This program shall include any elements
deemed appropriate to deal with the nonpoint pollution threatening water
quality, including, but not limited to, requiring the elimination or decrease
of contaminants in storm water runoff, using natural areas such as wetlands
to filter contaminants from storm water runoff, establishing monitoring,
inspection, and repair elements to ensure that on-site sewage systems are
adequately maintained and working properly, assuring that animal grazing and
manure management practices are consistent with best management practices, and
establishing educational and public involvement programs to inform citizens on
the causes of the threatening nonpoint pollution and what they can do to
decrease the amount of such pollution. An element may be omitted where another
program is effectively addressing those sources of nonpoint water pollution.
Within the limits of RCW 90.72.040 and 90.72.070, the county legislative
authority shall have full jurisdiction and authority to manage, regulate, and
control its programs and to fix, alter, regulate, and control the fees for
services provided and charges or rates as provided under those programs.
Programs established under this chapter, may, but are not required to, be part
of a system of sewerage as defined in RCW 36.94.010.

---
END ---