BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF
WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec.
1. A new section is added
to chapter 84.36 RCW to read as follows:

(1) All machinery and
equipment owned by a farmer that is personal property is exempt from property
taxes levied for any state purpose if it is used exclusively in growing and
producing agricultural products during the calendar year for which the claim
for exemption is made.

(2) "Farmer"
has the same meaning as defined in RCW 82.04.213.

(3) A claim for
exemption under this section shall be filed with the county assessor together
with the verified statement required under RCW 84.40.190, for exemption from
taxes payable the following year. The claim shall be made solely upon forms as
prescribed and furnished by the department of revenue.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
2. A new section is added
to chapter 84.55 RCW to read as follows:

The levy for the state
in any year shall be reduced as necessary to prevent exemptions under section 1
of this act from resulting in a higher tax rate than would have occurred in the
absence of the exemptions under section 1 of this act.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 3. This act applies to taxes
levied for collection in 2003 and every year thereafter.

---
END ---