BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF
WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec.
1. (1) The department of
general administration shall work with commercial and industrial construction
industry organizations to develop guidelines for implementing on-site
construction waste management planning. The topics addressed in the guidelines
shall include, but shall not be limited to:

(a) Standards for
identifying the type of wastes generated during construction;

(b) Methods for
analyzing the availability and cost-effectiveness of recycling services for
each type of waste;

(c) Methods for
evaluating construction waste management alternatives given limited recycling
services in rural areas of the state;

(d) Strategies to
maximize reuse and recycling of wastes and minimize landfill disposal;

(e) Standardized
formats for on-site construction waste management planning and reporting
documents; and

(f) A training and
technical assistance plan for public and private building owners and
construction industry members, in order to facilitate incorporation of waste
management planning and recycling into standard construction industry practice.

(2) By December 15,
2001, the department of general administration shall provide a report to the
legislature on the development of the guidelines required by subsection (1) of
this section. The report shall include recommendations for incorporating
job-site waste management planning and recycling into standard construction
industry practice.

Sec. 2. RCW 43.19A.020 and 1996
c 198 s 1 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) The ((USEPA))
federal product standards, ((as now or hereafter amended)) adopted
under 42 U.S.C. Sec. 6962(e) as it exists on the effective date of this act,
are adopted as the minimum standards for the state of Washington. These
standards shall be implemented for at least the products listed in (((a) and
(b) of)) this subsection ((by the dates indicated)), unless the
director finds that a different standard would significantly increase recycled
product availability or competition.

(a) ((By July 1,
1997:

(i))) Paper and paper products;

(((ii))) (b)
Organic recovered materials; ((and

(iii))) (c) Latex paint products;

(((b) By July 1,
1997:

(i))) (d) Products for lower value uses
containing recycled plastics;

(((ii))) (e)
Retread and remanufactured tires;

(((iii))) (f)
Lubricating oils;

(((iv))) (g)
Automotive batteries;

(((v))) (h)
Building ((insulation)) products and materials;

(((vi))) (i)
Panelboard; and

(((vii))) (j)
Compost products.

(2) By July 1, 2001,
the director shall adopt product standards for strawboard manufactured using as
an ingredient straw that is produced as a byproduct in the production of cereal
grain or turf or grass seed and product standards for products made from
strawboard.

(3) The
standards required by this section shall be applied to recycled product
purchasing by the department ((and)), other state agencies,
and state postsecondary educational institutions. The standards may be
adopted or applied by any other local government in product procurement. The
standards shall provide for exceptions under appropriate circumstances to allow
purchases of recycled products that do not meet the minimum content
requirements of the standards.

Sec. 3. RCW 39.04.133 and 1996 c
198 s 5 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) The state's
preferences for the purchase and use of recycled content products shall be
included as a factor in the design and development of state capital improvement
projects.

(2) ((Specifications
for materials in state construction projects shall include the use of recycled
content products and recyclable products whenever practicable)) If a
construction project receives state public funding, the product standards, as
provided in RCW 43.19A.020, shall apply to the materials used in the project,
whenever the administering agency and project owner determine that such
products would be cost-effective and are readily available.

(3) This section does
not apply to contracts entered into by a municipality.

Sec. 4. RCW 70.95.010 and 1989 c
431 s 1 are each amended to read as follows:

The legislature finds:

(1) Continuing
technological changes in methods of manufacture, packaging, and marketing of
consumer products, together with the economic and population growth of this
state, the rising affluence of its citizens, and its expanding industrial
activity have created new and ever-mounting problems involving disposal of
garbage, refuse, and solid waste materials resulting from domestic,
agricultural, and industrial activities.

(2) Traditional methods
of disposing of solid wastes in this state are no longer adequate to meet the
ever-increasing problem. Improper methods and practices of handling and
disposal of solid wastes pollute our land, air and water resources, blight our
countryside, adversely affect land values, and damage the overall quality of
our environment.

(3) Considerations of
natural resource limitations, energy shortages, economics and the environment
make necessary the development and implementation of solid waste recovery
and/or recycling plans and programs.

(4) Waste reduction
must become a fundamental strategy of solid waste management. It is therefore
necessary to change manufacturing and purchasing practices and waste generation
behaviors to reduce the amount of waste that becomes a governmental
responsibility.

(5) Source separation
of waste must become a fundamental strategy of solid waste management.
Collection and handling strategies should have, as an ultimate goal, the source
separation of all materials with resource value or environmental hazard.

(6)(a) It ((is the
responsibility)) should be the goal of every person to minimize his
or her production of wastes and to separate recyclable or hazardous materials
from mixed waste.

(b) It is the
responsibility of state, county, and city governments to provide for a waste
management infrastructure to fully implement waste reduction and source
separation strategies and to process and dispose of remaining wastes in a
manner that is environmentally safe and economically sound. It is further the
responsibility of state, county, and city governments to monitor the
cost-effectiveness and environmental safety of combusting separated waste,
processing mixed waste, and recycling programs.

(c) It is the
responsibility of county and city governments to assume primary responsibility
for solid waste management and to develop and implement aggressive and
effective waste reduction and source separation strategies.

(d) It is the
responsibility of state government to ensure that local governments are
providing adequate source reduction and separation opportunities and incentives
to all, including persons in both rural and urban areas, and nonresidential
waste generators such as commercial, industrial, and institutional entities,
recognizing the need to provide flexibility to accommodate differing population
densities, distances to and availability of recycling markets, and collection
and disposal costs in each community; and to provide county and city governments
with adequate technical resources to accomplish this responsibility.

(7) Environmental and
economic considerations in solving the state's solid waste management problems
requires strong consideration by local governments of regional solutions and
intergovernmental cooperation.

(8) The following
priorities for the collection, handling, and management of solid waste are
necessary and should be followed in descending order as applicable:

(a) Waste reduction;

(b) Recycling, with
source separation of recyclable materials as the preferred method;

(c) Energy recovery,
incineration, or landfill of separated waste;

(d) Energy recovery,
incineration, or landfilling of mixed wastes.

(9) It is the state's
goal to achieve a fifty percent recycling rate by ((1995)) 2006.

(10) It is the
state's goal that programs be established to eliminate residential or
commercial yard debris in landfills by 2011 in those areas where alternatives
to disposal are readily available and effective.

(11) Steps
should be taken to make recycling at least as affordable and convenient to the
ratepayer as mixed waste disposal.

(((11))) (12)
It is necessary to compile and maintain adequate data on the types and
quantities of solid waste that are being generated and to monitor how the
various types of solid waste are being managed.

(((12))) (13)
Vehicle batteries should be recycled and the disposal of vehicle batteries into
landfills or incinerators should be discontinued.

(((13))) (14)
Excessive and nonrecyclable packaging of products should be avoided.

(((14))) (15)
Comprehensive education should be conducted throughout the state so that people
are informed of the need to reduce, source separate, and recycle solid waste.

(((15))) (16)
All governmental entities in the state should set an example by implementing
aggressive waste reduction and recycling programs at their workplaces and by
purchasing products that are made from recycled materials and are recyclable.

(((16))) (17)
To ensure the safe and efficient operations of solid waste disposal facilities,
it is necessary for operators and regulators of landfills and incinerators to
receive training and certification.

(((17))) (18)
It is necessary to provide adequate funding to all levels of government so that
successful waste reduction and recycling programs can be implemented.

(((18))) (19)
The development of stable and expanding markets for recyclable materials is
critical to the long-term success of the state's recycling goals. Market
development must be encouraged on a state, regional, and national basis to
maximize its effectiveness. The state shall assume primary responsibility for
the development of a multifaceted market development program to carry out the
purposes of this act.

(((19))) (20)
There is an imperative need to anticipate, plan for, and accomplish effective
storage, control, recovery, and recycling of discarded tires and other problem
wastes with the subsequent conservation of resources and energy.

Sec. 5. RCW 70.95.030 and 1998 c
36 s 17 are each amended to read as follows:

As used in this
chapter, unless the context indicates otherwise:

(1) "City"
means every incorporated city and town.

(2)
"Commission" means the utilities and transportation commission.

(3)
"Committee" means the state solid waste advisory committee.

(4) "Composted
material" means organic solid waste that has been subjected to controlled
aerobic degradation at a solid waste facility in compliance with the
requirements of this chapter. Natural decay of organic solid waste under
uncontrolled conditions does not result in composted material.

(5)
"Department" means the department of ecology.

(6)
"Director" means the director of the department of ecology.

(7) "Disposal
site" means the location where any final treatment, utilization,
processing, or deposit of solid waste occurs.

(8) "Energy
recovery" means a process operating under federal and state environmental
laws and regulations for converting solid waste into usable energy and for
reducing the volume of solid waste.

(9) "Functional
standards" means criteria for solid waste handling expressed in terms of
expected performance or solid waste handling functions.

(10)
"Incineration" means a process of reducing the volume of solid waste
operating under federal and state environmental laws and regulations by use of
an enclosed device using controlled flame combustion.

(11)
"Jurisdictional health department" means city, county, city-county,
or district public health department.

(12)
"Landfill" means a disposal facility or part of a facility at which
solid waste is placed in or on land and which is not a land treatment facility.

(13) "Local
government" means a city, town, or county.

(14) "Modify"
means to substantially change the design or operational plans including, but
not limited to, removal of a design element previously set forth in a permit
application or the addition of a disposal or processing activity that is not
approved in the permit.

(15) "Multiple
family residence" means any structure housing two or more dwelling units.

(16) "Person"
means individual, firm, association, copartnership, political subdivision,
government agency, municipality, industry, public or private corporation, or
any other entity whatsoever.

(17) "Recyclable
materials" means those solid wastes that are separated for recycling or
reuse, such as papers, metals, and glass, that are identified as recyclable
material pursuant to a local comprehensive solid waste plan. Prior to the
adoption of the local comprehensive solid waste plan, adopted pursuant to RCW
70.95.110(2), local governments may identify recyclable materials by ordinance
from July 23, 1989.

(18)
"Recycling" means transforming or remanufacturing waste materials
into usable or marketable materials for use other than landfill disposal or
incineration.

(19)
"Residence" means the regular dwelling place of an individual or
individuals.

(20) "Sewage
sludge" means a semisolid substance consisting of settled sewage solids
combined with varying amounts of water and dissolved materials, generated from
a wastewater treatment system, that does not meet the requirements of chapter
70.95J RCW.

(21) "Soil
amendment" means any substance that is intended to improve the physical
characteristics of the soil, except composted material, commercial fertilizers,
agricultural liming agents, unmanipulated animal manures, unmanipulated
vegetable manures, food wastes, food processing wastes, and materials exempted
by rule of the department, such as biosolids as defined in chapter 70.95J RCW
and wastewater as regulated in chapter 90.48 RCW.

(22) "Solid
waste" or "wastes" means all putrescible and nonputrescible
solid and semisolid wastes including, but not limited to, garbage, rubbish,
ashes, industrial wastes, swill, sewage sludge, demolition and construction
wastes, abandoned vehicles or parts thereof, and recyclable materials.

(23) "Solid waste
handling" means the management, storage, collection, transportation,
treatment, utilization, processing, and final disposal of solid wastes,
including the recovery and recycling of materials from solid wastes, the
recovery of energy resources from solid wastes or the conversion of the energy
in solid wastes to more useful forms or combinations thereof.

(24) "Source
separation" means the separation of different kinds of solid waste at the
place where the waste originates.

(25)
"Vehicle" includes every device physically capable of being moved
upon a public or private highway, road, street, or watercourse and in, upon, or
by which any person or property is or may be transported or drawn upon a public
or private highway, road, street, or watercourse, except devices moved by human
or animal power or used exclusively upon stationary rails or tracks.

(26)
"Waste-derived soil amendment" means any soil amendment as defined in
this chapter that is derived from solid waste as defined in RCW 70.95.030, but
does not include biosolids or biosolids products regulated under chapter 70.95J
RCW or wastewaters regulated under chapter 90.48 RCW.

(27) "Waste
reduction" means reducing the amount or toxicity of waste generated or
reusing materials.

(28) "Yard
debris" means plant material commonly created in the course of maintaining
yards and gardens, and through horticulture, gardening, landscaping, or similar
activities. Yard debris includes but is not limited to grass clippings, leaves,
branches, brush, weeds, flowers, roots, windfall fruit, vegetable garden
debris, holiday trees, and tree prunings four inches or less in diameter.

Sec. 6. RCW 70.95.090 and 1991 c
298 s 3 are each amended to read as follows:

Each county and city
comprehensive solid waste management plan shall include the following:

(1) A detailed
inventory and description of all existing solid waste handling facilities
including an inventory of any deficiencies in meeting current solid waste handling
needs.

(2) The estimated
long-range needs for solid waste handling facilities projected twenty years
into the future.

(3) A program for the
orderly development of solid waste handling facilities in a manner consistent
with the plans for the entire county which shall:

(a) Meet the minimum
functional standards for solid waste handling adopted by the department and all
laws and regulations relating to air and water pollution, fire prevention,
flood control, and protection of public health;

(b) Take into account
the comprehensive land use plan of each jurisdiction;

(c) Contain a six year
construction and capital acquisition program for solid waste handling
facilities; and

(d) Contain a plan for
financing both capital costs and operational expenditures of the proposed solid
waste management system.

(4) A program for
surveillance and control.

(5) A current inventory
and description of solid waste collection needs and operations within each
respective jurisdiction which shall include:

(a) Any franchise for
solid waste collection granted by the utilities and transportation commission
in the respective jurisdictions including the name of the holder of the
franchise and the address of his or her place of business and the area covered
by the franchise;

(b) Any city solid
waste operation within the county and the boundaries of such operation;

(c) The population
density of each area serviced by a city operation or by a franchised operation
within the respective jurisdictions;

(d) The projected solid
waste collection needs for the respective jurisdictions for the next six years.

(6) A comprehensive
waste reduction and recycling element that, in accordance with the priorities
established in RCW 70.95.010, provides programs that (a) reduce the amount of
waste generated, (b) provide incentives and mechanisms for source separation,
and (c) establish recycling opportunities for the source separated waste.

(7) The waste reduction
and recycling element shall include the following:

(a) Waste reduction
strategies;

(b) Source separation
strategies, including:

(i) Programs for the
collection of source separated materials from residences in urban and rural
areas. In urban areas, these programs shall include collection of source
separated recyclable materials from single and multiple family residences,
unless the department approves an alternative program, according to the
criteria in the planning guidelines. Such criteria shall include: Anticipated
recovery rates and levels of public participation, availability of
environmentally sound disposal capacity, access to markets for recyclable
materials, unreasonable cost impacts on the ratepayer over the six-year
planning period, utilization of environmentally sound waste reduction and
recycling technologies, and other factors as appropriate. In rural areas,
these programs shall include but not be limited to drop-off boxes, buy-back
centers, or a combination of both, at each solid waste transfer, processing, or
disposal site, or at locations convenient to the residents of the county. The
drop-off boxes and buy-back centers may be owned or operated by public,
nonprofit, or private persons;

(ii) Programs to
monitor the collection of source separated waste at nonresidential sites where
there is sufficient density to sustain a program;

(iii) Programs to
collect yard waste, if the county or city submitting the plan finds that there
are adequate markets or capacity for composted yard waste within or near the
service area to consume the majority of the material collected; and

(iv) Programs to
educate and promote the concepts of waste reduction and recycling;

(c) Recycling
strategies, including a description of markets for recyclables, a review of
waste generation trends, a description of waste composition, a discussion and description
of existing programs and any additional programs needed to assist public and
private sector recycling, and an implementation schedule for the designation of
specific materials to be collected for recycling, and for the provision of
recycling collection services; and

(d) Other information
the county or city submitting the plan determines is necessary.

(8) An assessment of
the plan's impact on the costs of solid waste collection. The assessment shall
be prepared in conformance with guidelines established by the utilities and
transportation commission. The commission shall cooperate with the Washington
state association of counties and the association of Washington cities in
establishing such guidelines.

(9) A review of
potential areas that meet the criteria as outlined in RCW 70.95.165.

Sec. 7. RCW 70.95.290 and 1988 c
184 s 3 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) The evaluation of
the solid waste stream required in RCW 70.95.280 shall include the following
elements:

(a) The department
shall determine which management method for each category of solid waste will
have the least environmental impact; and

(b) The department
shall evaluate the costs of various management options for each category of
solid waste, including a review of market availability, and shall take into
consideration the economic impact on affected parties;

(c) Based on the
results of (a) and (b) of this subsection, the department shall determine the
best management for each category of solid waste. Different management methods
for the same categories of waste may be developed for different parts of the
state.

(2) The department
shall give priority to evaluating categories of solid waste that, in relation
to other categories of solid waste, comprise a large volume of the solid waste
stream or present a high potential of harm to human health. At a minimum the
following categories of waste shall be evaluated:

(a) By January 1, 1989,
yard waste and other biodegradable materials, paper products, disposable
diapers, and batteries; ((and))

(b) By January 1, 1990,
metals, glass, plastics, styrofoam or rigid lightweight cellular polystyrene,
and tires; and

(c) By January 1,
2003, construction, demolition, and land-clearing debris and food wastes.

Sec. 8. RCW 43.19.1905 and 1995
c 269 s 1402 are each amended to read as follows:

The director of general
administration shall establish overall state policy for compliance by all state
agencies, including educational institutions, regarding the following
purchasing and material control functions:

(1) Development of a
state commodity coding system, including common stock numbers for items
maintained in stores for reissue;

(2) Determination where
consolidations, closures, or additions of stores operated by state agencies and
educational institutions should be initiated;

(3) Institution of
standard criteria for determination of when and where an item in the state
supply system should be stocked;

(4) Establishment of
stock levels to be maintained in state stores, and formulation of standards for
replenishment of stock;

(5) Formulation of an
overall distribution and redistribution system for stock items which
establishes sources of supply support for all agencies, including interagency
supply support;

(6) Determination of
what function data processing equipment, including remote terminals, shall
perform in statewide purchasing and material control for improvement of service
and promotion of economy;

(7) Standardization of records
and forms used statewide for supply system activities involving purchasing,
receiving, inspecting, storing, requisitioning, and issuing functions,
including a standard notification form for state agencies to report
cost-effective direct purchases, which shall at least identify the price of the
goods as available through the division of purchasing, the price of the goods
as available from the alternative source, the total savings, and the signature
of the notifying agency's director or the director's designee;

(8) Screening of
supplies, material, and equipment excess to the requirements of one agency for
overall state need before sale as surplus;

(9) Establishment of
warehouse operation and storage standards to achieve uniform, effective, and
economical stores operations;

(10) Establishment of
time limit standards for the issuing of material in store and for processing
requisitions requiring purchase;

(11) Formulation of
criteria for determining when centralized rather than decentralized purchasing
shall be used to obtain maximum benefit of volume buying of identical or
similar items, including procurement from federal supply sources;

(12) Development of
criteria for use of leased, rather than state owned, warehouse space based on
relative cost and accessibility;

(13) Institution of
standard criteria for purchase and placement of state furnished materials,
carpeting, furniture, fixtures, and nonfixed equipment, in newly constructed or
renovated state buildings;

(14) Determination of
how transportation costs incurred by the state for materials, supplies,
services, and equipment can be reduced by improved freight and traffic
coordination and control;

(15) Establishment of a
formal certification program for state employees who are authorized to perform
purchasing functions as agents for the state under the provisions of chapter
43.19 RCW;

(16) Development of
performance measures for the reduction of total overall expense for material,
supplies, equipment, and services used each biennium by the state;

(17) Establishment of a
standard system for all state organizations to record and report dollar savings
and cost avoidance which are attributable to the establishment and
implementation of improved purchasing and material control procedures;

(18) Development of
procedures for mutual and voluntary cooperation between state agencies,
including educational institutions, and political subdivisions for exchange of
purchasing and material control services;

(19) Resolution of all
other purchasing and material matters which require the establishment of
overall statewide policy for effective and economical supply management;

(20) Development of
guidelines and criteria for the purchase of vehicles, alternate vehicle fuels
and systems, equipment, and materials that reduce overall energy-related costs
and energy use by the state, including the requirement that new passenger
vehicles purchased by the state meet the minimum standards for passenger
automobile fuel economy established by the United States secretary of
transportation pursuant to the energy policy and conservation act (15 U.S.C.
Sec. 2002);

(21) Development of
goals for state use of recycled and environmentally preferable products through
specifications for products and services, processes for requests for proposals
and requests for qualifications, contractor selection, and contract negotiations.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
9. A new section is added
to chapter 81.77 RCW to read as follows:

(1) The commission
shall allow solid waste collection companies collecting recyclable materials to
retain up to thirty percent of the revenue paid to the companies for the
material if the companies submit a plan to the commission that is certified by
the appropriate local government authority as being consistent with the local
government solid waste plan and that demonstrates how the revenues will be used
to increase recycling. The remaining seventy percent of the revenue shall be
passed to residential customers served throughout the state.

(2) By December 2,
2004, the commission shall provide a report to the legislature that evaluates:

(a) The effectiveness
of revenue sharing as an incentive to increase recycling in the state; and

(b) The effect of
revenue sharing on costs to customers.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 10. Section 2 of this act is
necessary for the immediate preservation of the public peace, health, or
safety, or support of the state government and its existing public
institutions, and takes effect July 1, 2001.

---
END ---