BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF
WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec.
1. A new section is added
to chapter 42.52 RCW to read as follows:

(1) During the
twelve-month period beginning on December 1st of the year before a general
election for a state official's election to office and continuing through
November 30th immediately after the general election, the state official may
not mail to a constituent at public expense a letter, newsletter, brochure, or
other piece of literature, and may not make public service broadcasts at public
expense, except as follows:

(a) The state official
may mail two mailings of newsletters to constituents. All newsletters within
each mailing of newsletters must be identical as to their content but not as to
the constituent name or address. One such mailing may be mailed no later than
March 30th and the other mailing may be mailed no later than June 30th;

(b) The state official
may mail as an individual letter to (i) an individual constituent who has
contacted the state official regarding the subject matter of the letter during
the official's current term of office; (ii) an individual constituent who holds
a governmental office with jurisdiction over the subject matter of the letter;
or (iii) an individual constituent who has received an award or honor of
extraordinary distinction of a type that is sufficiently infrequent to be
noteworthy to a reasonable person, including, but not limited to: (A) An
international or national award such as the Nobel prize or the Pulitzer prize;
(B) a state award such as Washington scholar; (C) an Eagle Scout award; and (D)
a Medal of Honor.

(2) The restriction on
mailings in subsection (1) of this section does not apply to (a) brochures or
other pieces of literature mailed as part of the regular duties of the state
office that only refer to the office and do not include the name of the state
official; or (b) correspondence on state office letterhead mailed by employees
of the state office that are part of the regular duties of the state office.

(3) The restriction on
public service broadcasts under subsection (1) of this section does not apply
to public service broadcasts that are part of the regular duties of the state
office that only mention or visually display the state office and do not
mention or visually display the name of the state official in the broadcast.

(4) For the purposes of
subsection (1) of this section, "state official" means a state
official in the executive branch of state government who is a
"candidate," as defined by RCW 42.17.020, for any public office.

(5) This section does
not apply to legislators, who are subject to the restrictions under RCW
42.52.185, or to state officials in the judicial branch of state government.

(6) A
violation of this section constitutes use of the facilities of a public office
for the purpose of assisting a campaign under RCW 42.52.180.

--- END ---