BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF
WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1. RCW 39.04.010 and 2000 c
138 s 102 are each amended to read as follows:

The term state shall
include the state of Washington and all departments, supervisors, commissioners
and agencies thereof.

The term municipality
shall include every city, county, town, district or other public agency thereof
which is authorized by law to require the execution of public work, except
drainage districts, diking districts, diking and drainage improvement
districts, drainage improvement districts, diking improvement districts,
consolidated diking and drainage improvement districts, consolidated drainage
improvement districts, consolidated diking improvement districts, irrigation
districts or any such other districts as shall from time to time be authorized
by law for the reclamation or development of waste or undeveloped lands.

The term public work
shall include all work, construction, alteration, repair, or improvement other
than ordinary maintenance, executed at the cost of the state or of any
municipality, or which is by law a lien or charge on any property therein. All
public works, including maintenance when performed by contract shall comply
with the provisions of ((RCW 39.12.020)) chapter 39.12 RCW. The
term does not include work, construction, alteration, repair, or improvement
performed under contracts entered into under RCW 36.102.060(4) or under
development agreements entered into under RCW 36.102.060(7) or leases entered into
under RCW 36.102.060(8).

The term contract shall
mean a contract in writing for the execution of public work for a fixed or
determinable amount duly awarded after advertisement and competitive bid.
However, a contract which is awarded from a small works roster need not be
advertised.

Sec. 2. RCW 39.12.020 and 1989 c
12 s 7 are each amended to read as follows:

The hourly wages to be
paid to laborers, workers, or mechanics, upon all public works and under all
public building service maintenance contracts of the state or any county,
municipality or political subdivision created by its laws, shall be not less
than the prevailing rate of wage for an hour's work in the same trade or
occupation in the locality within the state where such labor is performed. For
a contract in excess of ten thousand dollars, a contractor required to pay the
prevailing rate of wage shall post in a location readily visible to workers at
the job site: PROVIDED, That on road construction, sewer line, pipeline,
transmission line, street, or alley improvement projects for which no field
office is needed or established, a contractor may post the prevailing rate of
wage statement at the contractor's local office, gravel crushing, concrete, or
asphalt batch plant as long as the contractor provides a copy of the wage
statement to any employee on request:

(1) A copy of a
statement of intent to pay prevailing wages approved by the industrial
statistician of the department of labor and industries under RCW 39.12.040; and

(2) The address and
telephone number of the industrial statistician of the department of labor and
industries where a complaint or inquiry concerning prevailing wages may be
made.

((This chapter shall
not apply to workers or other persons regularly employed on monthly or per diem
salary by the state, or any county, municipality, or political subdivision
created by its laws.))

NEW SECTION. Sec.
3. A new section is added
to chapter 39.12 RCW to read as follows:

This chapter does not
apply to:

(1) Workers or other
persons regularly employed on a monthly or per diem salary by the state, or any
county, municipality, or political subdivision created by its laws; or

(2) Common school
construction performed under Title 28A RCW.

Sec. 4. RCW 28A.335.190 and 2000
c 138 s 201 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) When, in the
opinion of the board of directors of any school district, the cost of any
furniture, supplies, equipment, architectural and engineering services,
building, improvements, or repairs, or other work or purchases, except books,
will equal or exceed the sum of fifty thousand dollars, complete plans and
specifications for such work or purchases shall be prepared and notice by
publication given in at least one newspaper of general circulation within the
district, once each week for two consecutive weeks, of the intention to receive
bids therefor and that specifications and other information may be examined at
the office of the board or any other officially designated location: PROVIDED,
That the board without giving such notice may make improvements or repairs to
the property of the district through the shop and repair department of such
district when the total of such improvements or repair does not exceed the sum
of (a) fifteen thousand dollars, for districts with fifteen thousand five
hundred or more full-time equivalent students; or (b) for districts with fewer
than fifteen thousand five hundred full-time equivalent students, fifteen
thousand dollars if more than one craft or trade is involved with the school
district improvement or repair, or ten thousand dollars if a single craft or
trade is involved with the school district improvement or repair. The cost of
any public work, improvement or repair for the purposes of this section shall
be the aggregate of all amounts to be paid for labor, material, and equipment
on one continuous or interrelated project where work is to be performed
simultaneously or in close sequence. The bids shall be in writing and shall be
opened and read in public on the date and in the place named in the notice and
after being opened shall be filed for public inspection.

(2) Every purchase of
furniture, equipment or supplies, except books, the cost of which is estimated
to be in excess of fifteen thousand dollars, shall be on a competitive basis.
The board of directors shall establish a procedure for securing telephone
and/or written quotations for such purchases. Whenever the estimated cost is
from fifteen thousand dollars up to fifty thousand dollars, the procedure shall
require quotations from at least three different sources to be obtained in
writing or by telephone, and recorded for public perusal. Whenever the
estimated cost is in excess of fifty thousand dollars, the public bidding
process provided in subsection (1) of this section shall be followed.

(3) Every architectural
and engineering service, building, improvement, repair or other public
works project, the cost of which is estimated to be in excess of (a) fifteen
thousand dollars, for districts with fifteen thousand five hundred or more
full-time equivalent students; or (b) for districts with fewer than fifteen
thousand five hundred full-time equivalent students, fifteen thousand dollars
if more than one craft or trade is involved with the school district
improvement or repair, or ten thousand dollars if a single craft or trade is
involved with the school district improvement or repair, shall be on a
competitive bid process. Whenever the estimated cost of architectural and
engineering services or a public works project is fifty thousand dollars or
more, the public bidding process provided in subsection (1) of this section
shall be followed unless the contract is let using the small works roster
process in RCW 39.04.155 or under any other procedure authorized for school
districts. One or more school districts may authorize an educational service
district to establish and operate a small works roster for the school district
under the provisions of RCW 39.04.155.

(4) The contract for
the work or purchase shall be awarded to the lowest responsible bidder as
defined in RCW 43.19.1911 but the board may by resolution reject any and all
bids and make further calls for bids in the same manner as the original call.
On any work or purchase the board shall provide bidding information to any
qualified bidder or the bidder's agent, requesting it in person.

(5) In the event of any
emergency when the public interest or property of the district would suffer
material injury or damage by delay, upon resolution of the board declaring the
existence of such an emergency and reciting the facts constituting the same,
the board may waive the requirements of this section with reference to any
purchase or contract: PROVIDED, That an "emergency", for the
purposes of this section, means a condition likely to result in immediate
physical injury to persons or to property of the school district in the absence
of prompt remedial action.

(6) This section does not
apply to the direct purchase of school buses by school districts and
educational services in accordance with RCW 28A.160.195.

Sec. 5. RCW 39.80.020 and 1999 c
153 s 55 are each amended to read as follows:

Unless the context
clearly requires otherwise, the definitions in this section shall apply
throughout this chapter.

(1) "State
agency" means any department, agency, commission, bureau, office, or any
other entity or authority of the state government.

(2) "Local
agency" means any city and any town, county, special district, municipal
corporation, agency, port district or authority, or political subdivision of
any type, or any other entity or authority of local government in corporate
form or otherwise, other than a school district.

(3) "Special
district" means a local unit of government, other than a city, town, ((or))
county, or school district, authorized by law to perform a single
function or a limited number of functions, and including but not limited to,
water-sewer districts, irrigation districts, fire districts, ((school
districts,)) community college districts, hospital districts,
transportation districts, and metropolitan municipal corporations organized
under chapter 35.58 RCW.

(4) "Agency"
means both state and local agencies and special districts as defined in
subsections (1), (2), and (3) of this section.

(5) "Architectural
and engineering services" or "professional services" means
professional services rendered by any person, other than as an employee of the
agency, contracting to perform activities within the scope of the general
definition of professional practice in chapters 18.08, 18.43, or 18.96 RCW.

(6) "Person"
means any individual, organization, group, association, partnership, firm,
joint venture, corporation, or any combination thereof.

(7)
"Consultant" means any person providing professional services who is
not an employee of the agency for which the services are provided.

(8)
"Application" means a completed statement of qualifications together
with a request to be considered for the award of one or more contracts for
professional services.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
6. A new section is added
to chapter 82.08 RCW to read as follows:

The tax levied by RCW
82.08.020 does not apply to sales of items that become components of a public
school, as defined in RCW 28A.150.010.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
7. A new section is added
to chapter 82.12 RCW to read as follows:

The
provisions of this chapter do not apply in respect to the use of items that
become components of a public school, as defined in RCW 28A.150.010.

---
END ---