BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF
WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec.
1. PURPOSE. The purpose of this act
is to create a system of clean elections for legislative and gubernatorial
campaigns that will improve the integrity of Washington state government by
diminishing the influence of special‑interest money, encourage citizen
participation in the political process, promote freedom of speech under the
United States and Washington constitutions, and refocus campaigns on issues and
away from the sources of campaign contributions.

Further, it is the
purpose of this act to alter the existing system of campaign finance for
legislative and gubernatorial campaigns, which system (1) allows elected
officials and challengers to accept large campaign contributions from private
interests over which they have or may have governmental jurisdiction; (2) gives
incumbents an unhealthy advantage over challengers; (3) hinders many qualified
candidates from effectively communicating with voters; (4) effectively
suppresses the voices and influence of the vast majority of Washington citizens
in favor of a small number of wealthy special interests; (5) undermines public
confidence in the integrity of public officials; (6) costs average taxpayers
millions of dollars in the form of subsidies and special privileges often provided
for large campaign contributors; (7) drives up the cost of running for state
office, discouraging otherwise qualified candidates who lack personal wealth or
access to special‑interest funding; and (8) requires that elected
officials spend too much of their time raising funds rather than representing
the public.

PART I‑-VOLUNTARY SPENDING
LIMITATIONS AND

RELATED CONTRIBUTION LIMITATIONS

NEW SECTION. Sec.
101. VOLUNTARY LIMITATIONS ON
SPENDING AND CONTRIBUTIONS FOR POLITICAL CAMPAIGNS. (1) Notwithstanding any
law to the contrary, a participating candidate and a participating candidate's
authorized committee:

(a) Shall not accept
any contributions, other than a limited number of five‑dollar qualifying
contributions as specified in section 104 of this act and early contributions
as specified in section 103 of this act, except in the emergency situation
specified in section 111(4) of this act;

(b) Shall not expend
more than a total of five hundred dollars of the candidate's personal moneys
for a candidate for legislature or more than one thousand dollars of the
candidate's personal moneys for a candidate for governor;

(c) Shall not make
expenditures in the primary election period in excess of the primary election
spending limit;

(d) Shall not make
expenditures in the general election period in excess of the general election
spending limit; and

(e) Shall comply with
section 105 of this act regarding the authorized committee's account and
section 110 of this act regarding returning unused moneys to the citizens'
clean elections fund.

(2) However, a
participating candidate and one or more other candidates for the same office
may file a written agreement with the commission agreeing to expenditure limits
below those otherwise established under subsection (1) of this section. Each
candidate who signs such an agreement is subject to the lower spending
limitation and will receive the lower amounts of campaign funding under section
107 of this act.

(3) Any two or more
nonparticipating candidates for the same office may file a written agreement
with the commission establishing an expenditure limitation for their
campaigns. Each candidate who signs such an agreement is subject to this
spending limitation and is subject to fines, penalties, and forfeiture of
office provided in this chapter for violating this limitation as if the
candidate were a participating candidate.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
102. CERTIFICATION AS A
PARTICIPATING CANDIDATE. (1) A candidate who wishes to be certified as a
participating candidate shall, before the end of the qualifying period, file an
application with the commission using a form specified by the commission. The
application must identify the candidate, the office that the candidate plans to
seek, and the candidate's party, if any, and contain the candidate's signature,
under oath, certifying that:

(a) The candidate has
complied with the restrictions of section 101(1) of this act during the
election cycle to date;

(b) The candidate's
campaign committee has filed all campaign finance reports required under this
chapter during the election cycle to date that are complete and accurate; and

(c) The candidate will
comply with the requirements of section 101(1) of this act during the remainder
of the election cycle and, specifically, will not accept private contributions.

(2) The commission
shall act on the application within seven days. Unless, within that time, the
commission denies an application and provides written reasons that all or part
of a certification in subsection (1) of this section is incomplete or untrue,
the commission shall certify the candidate as a participating candidate. If
the commission denies an application for failure to file all complete and
accurate campaign finance reports or failure to make the certification in
subsection (1)(c) of this section, the candidate may reapply within two weeks
of the commission's decision by filing complete and accurate campaign finance
reports and another sworn certification.

(3) A candidate who is
certified as a participating candidate may use this designation in campaign
materials and will be so designated in the state voters' pamphlet.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
103. LIMITS ON EARLY
CONTRIBUTIONS. (1) A participating candidate may accept early contributions
only from individuals and only during the exploratory period and the qualifying
period, subject to the following limitations:

(a) Notwithstanding any
law to the contrary, a contributor may not give contributions exceeding one
hundred dollars during an election cycle and a participating candidate may not
accept contributions from a contributor exceeding one hundred dollars during an
election cycle;

(b) Notwithstanding any
law to the contrary, early contributions to a participating candidate from all
sources for an election cycle must not exceed, for a candidate for governor,
forty thousand dollars or, for a legislative candidate, ten percent of the sum
of the primary election spending limit and the general election spending limit;
and

(c) Qualifying
contributions specified under section 104 of this act will not be included in
determining whether the limits in this subsection have been exceeded.

(2) Early contributions
specified in subsection (1) of this section and the candidate's personal moneys
specified in section 101(1)(b) of this act may be spent only during the
exploratory period and the qualifying period. Any early contributions not
spent by the end of the qualifying period must be paid to the citizens' clean
elections fund.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
104. QUALIFYING
CONTRIBUTIONS. (1) During the qualifying period, a participating candidate may
collect qualifying contributions, which must be paid to the citizens' clean
elections fund.

(2) To qualify as a
"qualifying contribution," a contribution must be:

(a) Made by a
registered voter who at the time of the contribution was registered in the
electoral district of the office the candidate is seeking and who has not given
another qualifying contribution to that candidate during that election cycle;

(b) Made by a person
who is not given anything of value in exchange for the qualifying contribution;

(c) In the sum of five
dollars, exactly;

(d) Received
unsolicited during the qualifying period or solicited during the qualifying
period by a person who is not employed or retained by the candidate and who is
not compensated to collect contributions by the candidate or on behalf of the
candidate;

(e) If made by check or
money order, made payable to the candidate's authorized committee, or if in
cash, deposited in the sole account in the candidate's authorized committee;
and

(f) Accompanied by a
three‑part reporting slip that includes the printed name, registration
address, and signature of the contributor, the name of the candidate for whom
the contribution is made, the date, and the printed name and signature of the
solicitor.

(3) A copy of the reporting
slip must be given as a receipt to the contributor, and another copy must be
retained by the candidate's campaign committee. Delivery of the reporting
slips to the commission excuses the candidate from disclosure of these
contributions on campaign finance reports filed under RCW 42.17.080.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
105. CONTROLS ON A
PARTICIPATING CANDIDATE'S AUTHORIZED COMMITTEE. (1) A participating candidate
and the participating candidate's authorized committee shall conduct all
financial activity through a single account. A participating candidate may not
make any deposits into this account other than those permitted under sections
103, 104, and 107 of this act.

(2) A participating
candidate and the treasurer of the participating candidate's authorized
committee must sign a joint statement under oath promising to comply with the
requirements of sections 101 through 117 of this act.

(3) A participating
candidate or the treasurer of the participating candidate's authorized committee
shall pay moneys from the authorized committee's account directly to the person
providing goods or services to the campaign and shall identify, on reports
filed under RCW 42.17.080 the full name and street address of the person and
the nature of the goods or services and compensation for which payment has been
made. However, an authorized committee may establish one or more petty cash
accounts, which in aggregate must not exceed one thousand dollars at any time.
A single expenditure may not be made from a petty cash account exceeding one
hundred dollars. Expenditures from any petty cash accounts must also be
included in reports filed under RCW 42.17.080.

(4) Moneys in the
account of a participating candidate's authorized committee may not be used to
pay fines or civil penalties, for costs or legal fees related to representation
before the commission, or for defense of any enforcement action under this
chapter. Nothing in this subsection prevents a participating candidate from
having a legal defense fund.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
106. QUALIFICATION FOR CLEAN
CAMPAIGN FUNDING. (1) A candidate who has applied for certification may also
apply, in accordance with subsection (2) of this section, to receive funds from
the citizens' clean elections fund, instead of receiving private contributions.

(2) To receive funding
from the citizens' clean elections fund, a candidate must present to the
commission no later than one week after the end of the qualifying period a list
of names of persons who have made qualifying contributions under section 104 of
this act on behalf of the candidate. The list must be divided by county. At
the same time, the candidate must tender to the commission the original
reporting slips identified in section 104 of this act for persons on the list
and an amount equal to the sum of the qualifying contributions collected. The
commission shall deposit the amount into the citizens' clean elections fund.

(3) The commission
shall select at random a sample of five percent of the number of nonduplicative
names on the list and forward facsimiles of the selected reporting slips to the
county auditor of the counties of the addresses specified in the selected
slips. Within ten days, the county auditors shall provide a report to the
commission identifying as disqualified any slips that are unsigned or undated
or that the auditor is unable to verify as matching a person who is registered
to vote, on the date specified on the slip, inside the electoral district of
the office the candidate is seeking. The commission shall multiply the number
of slips not disqualified by twenty, and if the result is greater than one
hundred ten percent of the quantity required, shall approve the candidate for
funds, and if the result is less than ninety percent of the quantity required,
shall deny the application for funds. Otherwise, the commission shall forward
facsimiles of all of the slips to the county auditors for verification, and the
county auditors shall check all slips by using the same process.

(4) To qualify for
clean campaign funding, a candidate must have been certified as a participating
candidate under section 102 of this act and have obtained: (a) Two hundred
qualifying contributions for a candidate for the state legislature; or (b) four
thousand qualifying contributions for a candidate for governor.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
107. CLEAN CAMPAIGN FUNDING.
(1) At the beginning of the primary election period, the commission shall
direct the state treasurer to pay from the citizens' clean elections fund to
the account of the authorized committee of each candidate who qualifies for
clean campaign funding an amount equal to the primary election spending limit.

(2) At any time after
the first day of January of an election year and before the regular filing
period specified under chapter 29.15 RCW, a candidate who has met the
requirements of section 106 of this act may sign and file a declaration of
candidacy and pay the filing fee as a candidate for the legislature or
governor. The commission shall pay the amount specified under subsection (1)
of this section immediately upon the filing of the declaration of candidacy and
payment of the filing fee, rather than waiting for the beginning of the primary
election period.

(3) At the beginning of
the general election period, the commission shall pay from the citizens' clean
elections fund to the account of the authorized committee of each candidate who
qualifies for clean campaign funding for the general election, except those
candidates identified in subsection (1) or (4) of this section, an amount equal
to the general election spending limit.

(4) At the beginning of
the general election period, the commission shall pay from the citizens' clean
elections fund to the campaign account of a qualified participating candidate
who has not received funds under subsection (1) of this section and who is
unopposed by any other candidate an amount equal to five dollars times the
number of qualifying contributions for that candidate certified by the
commission.

(5) The general
election spending limit, for a candidate who has received funds under
subsection (1) or (4) of this section, is equal to the amount that the
commission is obligated to pay to that candidate.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
108. EQUAL FUNDING OF
CANDIDATES. (1) Whenever during a primary election period a report is filed,
or other information comes to the attention of the commission, indicating that
a nonparticipating candidate for the same office as a participating candidate
has made expenditures during the election cycle to date exceeding the primary
election spending limit for the participating candidate, the commission shall
immediately pay from the citizens' clean elections fund to the account of the
authorized committee of any participating candidate seeking the same office as
the nonparticipating candidate, an amount equal to any excess of the reported
amount over the primary election spending limit, and the primary election spending
limit for all such participating candidates will be adjusted by increasing it
by the amount that the commission is obligated to pay to a participating
candidate.

(2) Whenever during a
general election period a report has been filed, or other information comes to
the attention of the commission, indicating that the amount a nonparticipating
candidate for the same office as a participating candidate has received in
contributions during the election cycle to date less the amount of expenditures
the nonparticipating candidate made through the end of the primary election
period exceeds the general election spending limit for a participating
candidate, the commission shall immediately pay from the citizens' clean
elections fund to the account of the authorized committee of any participating
candidate qualified for the ballot and seeking the same office as the
nonparticipating candidate, an amount equal to any excess of the reported
difference over the general election spending limit, and the general election spending
limit for all such participating candidates will be adjusted by increasing it
by the amount that the commission is obligated to pay to a participating
candidate.

(3) For purposes of
subsections (1) and (2) of this section the following expenditures reported
under sections 101 through 117 of this act will be treated as follows:

(a) Independent
expenditures against a participating candidate will be treated as expenditures
of each opposing candidate, for purposes of subsection (1) of this section, or
contributions to each opposing candidate, for purposes of subsection (2) of
this section.

(b) Independent
expenditures in favor of one or more nonparticipating opponents of a
participating candidate will be treated as expenditures of those
nonparticipating candidates, for purposes of subsection (1) of this section, or
contributions to those nonparticipating candidates, for purposes of subsection
(2) of this section.

(c) Independent
expenditures in favor of a participating candidate will be treated, for every
opposing participating candidate, as though the independent expenditures were
an expenditure of a nonparticipating opponent, for purposes of subsection (1)
of this section, or a contribution to a nonparticipating opponent, for purposes
of subsection (2) of this section.

(d) Expenditures made
before the general election period that consist of a contract, promise, or
agreement to make an expenditure during the general election period resulting
in an extension of credit will be treated as though made during the general election
period, and equalizing funds under subsection (2) of this section will be paid
at the start of the general election period.

(e) The commission
shall allocate expenditures for or against a participating candidate promoting
or opposing more than one candidate who are not running for the same office
among candidates for different offices based on the relative size or length and
relative prominence of the reference to candidates for different offices.

(4) If the adjusted
spending limit reaches three times the spending limit for a particular
election, then the commission shall not pay any further amounts from the
citizens' clean elections fund to the campaign account of the participating
candidate, and the spending limit will not be adjusted further.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
109. LIMITATIONS ON SPENDING
FROM THE CITIZENS' CLEAN ELECTIONS FUND. (1) The commission shall not spend,
on all costs incurred under sections 101 through 117 of this act during a
particular calendar year, more than two dollars and fifty cents times the
population of the state during the previous year, as certified by the office of
financial management. The commission may exceed this limit during a calendar
year, if it is offset by an equal reduction of the limit during another
calendar year during the same four‑year period beginning January 1st
immediately after a gubernatorial election.

(2) The commission may
use up to ten percent of the amount specified in subsection (1) of this section
for reasonable and necessary expenses of administration and enforcement of
sections 101 through 117 of this act, including the activities specified in
section 114 of this act. Any portion of the ten percent not used for this
purpose will remain in the fund.

(3) The commission shall
apply ten percent of the amount specified in subsection (1) of this section for
reasonable and necessary expenses associated with voter education, including
the activities specified in section 113(1) of this act.

(4) The state treasurer
shall administer a citizens' clean elections fund from which costs incurred
under sections 101 through 117 of this act will be paid.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
110. RETURN OF MONEYS TO THE
CITIZENS' CLEAN ELECTIONS FUND. (1) At the end of the primary election period,
a participating candidate who has received moneys under section 107(1) of this
act shall return to the citizens' clean elections fund all moneys in the
account of the candidate's authorized committee above an amount sufficient to pay
any unpaid bills for expenditures made during the primary election period and
for goods or services directed to the primary election.

(2) At the end of the
general election period, a participating candidate shall return to the
citizens' clean elections fund all moneys in the account of the candidate's
authorized committee above an amount sufficient to pay any unpaid bills for
expenditures made before the general election and for goods or services
directed to the general election.

(3) A participating
candidate shall pay all uncontested and unpaid bills referred to in this
section no later than thirty days after the primary or general election. A
participating candidate shall make monthly reports to the commission concerning
the status of the dispute over any contested bills. Any moneys in a
candidate's campaign account after payment of bills must be returned promptly
to the citizens' clean elections fund.

(4) If a participating
candidate is replaced as the result of a vacancy as provided under RCW 29.15.230,
and the replacement candidate files an oath with the commission certifying to
section 102(1)(c) of this act, the campaign account of the participating
candidate will be transferred to the replacement candidate and the commission
shall certify the replacement candidate as a participating candidate without
requiring compliance with section 106 of this act or the remainder of section
102 of this act. If the replacement candidate does not file such an oath, the
account of the authorized committee of the candidate whose position is vacant
will be liquidated and all remaining moneys returned to the citizens' clean
elections fund.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
111. CITIZENS' CLEAN ELECTIONS
FUND. (1) The citizens' clean elections fund is created in the custody of the
state treasurer as a fund separate from the state general fund. All receipts
from (a) taxes imposed under chapter 82.04 RCW on public relations or
advertising services; (b) beginning January 1, 2002, a ten percent surcharge, hereby
imposed, on all civil and criminal fines and penalties collected under this
chapter; (c) fees imposed on lobbyists under section 112 of this act; (d)
amounts returned under section 110 of this act; and (e) amounts turned over
under section 115(4) of this act must be deposited into the fund. Expenditures
from the fund may be used only as provided by sections 107 through 109 of this
act. Only the commission or its designee may authorize expenditures from the
fund. The fund is not subject to allotment procedures under chapter 43.88
RCW. All interest earnings and other income obtained from investing money in
the fund will remain with the fund, and no portion of these earnings may be
returned to the state investment board expense account as otherwise provided
under RCW 43.33A.160. An appropriation is not required for expenditures from
the fund, including authorized transfers that are made from the fund to the
account of the authorized committee of a participating candidate.

(2) At least once per
year, the commission shall project the amount of money that the fund will
receive over each of the next four years, when this money will become
available, and the required expenditures from the fund for each of the next
four calendar years. Whenever the commission determines that the fund contains
more money than the commission determines is required to meet current debts
plus expected expenses, under the assumption that expected expenses will be at
the expenditure limit in section 109(1) of this act and taking into account the
projections of anticipated revenues, the commission shall designate this money
as excess and so notify the state treasurer, who shall transfer the excess
money to the state general fund. Whenever the commission determines that the
citizens' clean elections fund will not contain sufficient money to meet its
current debts plus expected expenses, under the assumption that expected
expenses will be at the expenditure limit in section 109(1) of this act and
taking into account the projections of anticipated revenues, the commission
shall notify the legislature of this projected deficiency. The legislature
shall appropriate sufficient money from the general fund into the citizens'
clean elections fund necessary to meet this deficiency.

(3) If the legislature
fails to appropriate sufficient money to eliminate the projected deficiency,
then the commission shall announce the deficiency. The announcement may
include specifications for decreases in the following parameters, based on the
commission's projections of collections and expenses for the citizens' clean
elections fund, made in the following order:

(a) First, the
commission may announce a decrease in the adjusted spending limit under section
108(4) of this act from three times to an amount between three and one times.

(b) Next, the
commission may announce that the fund will provide equalization money under
section 108 (1) and (2) of this act as a fraction of the amounts there
specified.

(c) Finally, the
commission may announce that the fund will provide money under section 107 of
this act as a fraction of the amounts there specified.

(4) If the commission
cannot provide participating candidates with all money specified under sections
107 and 108 of this act, as decreased by any announcement under subsection (3)
of this section, then the commission shall allocate any reductions in payments
proportionately among candidates entitled to money and shall declare an
emergency. Upon declaration of an emergency, a participating candidate may
accept private contributions to bring the total money received by the candidate
from the fund and from such private contributions up to the adjusted spending
limits, as decreased by any announcement made under subsection (3) of this
section.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
112. LOBBYIST FEES. Beginning
on January 1, 2002, an annual fee of one hundred dollars is imposed on each
registered lobbyist who represents: (1) One or more persons in connection with
a commercial or for‑profit activity except public bodies; or (2) a
nonprofit entity predominately composed of or acting on behalf of a trade
association or other grouping of commercial or for‑profit entities. The
commission shall collect the fee and transmit it to the state treasurer for
deposit into the citizens' clean elections fund.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
113. VOTER EDUCATION AND
ENFORCEMENT DUTIES. (1) The commission shall sponsor debates among candidates
for the legislature and for governor, in such a format, manner, and times as
the commission determines. Participating candidates must attend and
participate in debates, and the commission may specify by rule penalties for a
participating candidate failing to participate in a debate. The commission
shall invite nonparticipating candidates to participate in the debates.

(2) The commission
shall:

(a) Prescribe forms for
reports, statements, notices, and other documents required by sections 101
through 117 of this act;

(b) Prepare and publish
instructions setting forth methods of bookkeeping and preservation of records
to facilitate compliance with sections 101 through 117 of this act and
explaining the duties of persons and committees under sections 101 through 117
of this act;

(c) Adopt rules to
implement sections 101 through 117 of this act, but these rules are not subject
to the requirements of RCW 34.05.310, and the joint administrative rules review
committee may not make these rules subject to RCW 34.05.328;

(d) Enforce sections
101 through 117 of this act, ensure that money from the citizens' clean
elections fund that is transferred into the account of an authorized committee
of a participating candidate is spent as specified in sections 101 through 117
of this act and not otherwise, monitor reports filed under sections 101 through
117 of this act and financial records of candidates as needed to ensure that
equalization moneys are paid promptly to opposing qualified candidates under
section 108 of this act.

(3) Based on the
results of the elections in the year 2002 or any subsequent presidential
election, and within six months after such an election, the commission may
adopt rules changing the number of qualifying contributions required for any
office from those listed in section 106(4) of this act by no more than twenty
percent of the number applicable for the preceding presidential election.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
114. ENFORCEMENT PROCEDURE.
(1) If the commission finds that there is reason to believe that a person has
violated any provision of sections 101 through 117 of this act, the commission
shall serve on that person an order stating with reasonable particularity the
nature of the violation and requiring compliance within fourteen days. During
that period, the alleged violator may provide any explanation to the
commission, comply with the order, or enter into a public administrative
settlement with the commission.

(2) Upon expiration of
the fourteen days, if the commission finds that the alleged violator remains
out of compliance, the commission shall make a public finding to that effect
and issue an order assessing a civil penalty in accordance with section 115 of
this act, unless the commission publishes findings of fact and conclusions of
law expressing good cause for reducing or excusing the penalty. The violator
has fourteen days from the date of issuance of the order assessing the penalty
to appeal to the superior court of Thurston County.

(3) A candidate in a
particular election contest who believes that an opposing candidate has
violated sections 101 through 117 of this act for that election may file a
complaint with the commission requesting that action be taken under this
section. If the commission fails to make a finding under subsection (1) of
this section within thirty days after the filing of the complaint, the
candidate may bring a civil action in the superior court of Thurston County to
impose the civil penalties prescribed in this section.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
115. CIVIL PENALTIES AND
FORFEITURE OF OFFICE. (1) The civil penalty for a violation of a contribution
or expenditure limit established under section 101 of this act by or on behalf
of a participating candidate is ten times the amount by which the expenditures
or contributions exceed the applicable limit.

(2) In addition to any
other penalties imposed by law, the civil penalty for a violation by or on
behalf of a participating candidate of a reporting requirement imposed by this
chapter is one hundred dollars per day for candidates for the legislature and
three hundred dollars per day for candidates for governor. The civil penalty
imposed under this subsection is doubled if the amount not reported for a
particular election cycle exceeds ten percent of the primary or general
election spending limit. A civil penalty imposed under this subsection may not
exceed twice the amount of expenditures or contributions not reported. The
candidate and the candidate's authorized committee are jointly and severally
responsible for a civil penalty imposed under this subsection.

(3) A campaign finance
report filed indicating a violation of section 101 (1), (2), or (3) of this act
involving an amount in excess of ten percent of the sum of the primary election
spending limit and the general election spending limit for a particular
candidate disqualifies the candidate and causes forfeiture of the office. The
commission or a citizen of this state may petition the superior court of
Thurston County for an order to disqualify the candidate and forfeit his or her
office.

(4) A participating
candidate adjudged to have committed a knowing violation of section 101 of this
act shall repay the amount from his or her personal funds to the citizens'
clean elections fund and shall turn over all money in the candidate's
authorized committee account to the citizens' clean elections fund.

(5) All civil penalties
collected under this section will be deposited into the citizens' clean
elections fund.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
116. CRIMINAL VIOLATIONS AND
PENALTIES. (1) A candidate, or any other person acting on behalf of a
candidate, who knowingly violates section 101 of this act is guilty of a gross
misdemeanor.

(2) A person who
knowingly pays any thing of value or any compensation for a qualifying
contribution as specified under section 104 of this act is guilty of a gross
misdemeanor.

(3) A person who
distributes, broadcasts, or otherwise indicates that a candidate is certified
as a participating candidate, with knowledge that this certification has not
been made or if made has been rescinded, is guilty of a gross misdemeanor.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
117. INFLATION AND OTHER
ADJUSTMENTS OF DOLLAR VALUES. (1) Every two years, the commission shall modify
the dollar values specified in the following sections, in the manner specified
by RCW 42.17.370 to account for inflation: (a) Section 101(1)(b) of this act;
(b) section 103(1) (a) and (b) of this act; (c) section 105(3) of this act; (d)
"primary election spending limits" and "general election
spending limits"; (e) section 109(1) of this act; (f) section 112 of this
act; and (g) section 115(2) of this act. Whenever a dollar value is so
adjusted, these statutes will be interpreted to apply to the inflation-adjusted
value.

(2) Based on the
results of the elections in the year 2002 or any presidential election
thereafter, and within six months after the election, the commission may adopt
rules reallocating funds available to all candidates between the primary and
general election by selecting a fraction for primary spending limits that is
between one-third and one-half of the spending limits for the election cycle.
For each office, the primary election spending limit will be modified to be the
sum of the primary and general spending limits times the selected fraction, and
the general election spending limit will be modified to be the same sum times
one less the selected fraction.

Sec. 118. RCW 42.17.020 and 1995 c
397 s 1 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) "Adjusted
spending limit" means a spending limit as further adjusted to account for
reported overages under section 108 of this act.

(2)
"Agency" includes all state agencies and all local agencies.
"State agency" includes every state office, department, division,
bureau, board, commission, or other state agency. "Local agency"
includes every county, city, town, municipal corporation, quasi-municipal
corporation, or special purpose district, or any office, department, division,
bureau, board, commission, or agency thereof, or other local public agency.

(((2))) (3)
"Authorized committee" means the political committee authorized by a
candidate, or by the public official against whom recall charges have been
filed, to accept contributions or make expenditures on behalf of the candidate
or public official.

(((3))) (4)
"Ballot proposition" means any "measure" as defined by RCW
29.01.110, or any initiative, recall, or referendum proposition proposed to be
submitted to the voters of the state or any municipal corporation, political
subdivision, or other voting constituency from and after the time when the
proposition has been initially filed with the appropriate election officer of
that constituency prior to its circulation for signatures.

(((4))) (5)
"Benefit" means a commercial, proprietary, financial, economic, or
monetary advantage, or the avoidance of a commercial, proprietary, financial,
economic, or monetary disadvantage.

(((5))) (6)
"Bona fide political party" means:

(a) An organization
that has filed a valid certificate of nomination with the secretary of state
under chapter 29.24 RCW;

(b) The governing body
of the state organization of a major political party, as defined in RCW
29.01.090, that is the body authorized by the charter or bylaws of the party to
exercise authority on behalf of the state party; or

(c) The county central
committee or legislative district committee of a major political party. There
may be only one legislative district committee for each party in each
legislative district.

(((6)
"Depository" means a bank designated by a candidate or political
committee pursuant to RCW 42.17.050.

(7)
"Treasurer" and "deputy treasurer" mean the individuals
appointed by a candidate or political committee, pursuant to RCW 42.17.050, to
perform the duties specified in that section.

(8))) (7) "Candidate" means any
individual who seeks nomination for election or election to public office. An
individual seeks nomination or election when he or she first:

(a) Receives
contributions or makes expenditures or reserves space or facilities with intent
to promote his or her candidacy for office;

(b) Announces publicly
or files for office;

(c) Purchases
commercial advertising space or broadcast time to promote his or her candidacy;
or

(d) Gives his or her
consent to another person to take on behalf of the individual any of the
actions in (a) or (c) of this subsection.

(((9))) (8)
"Caucus political committee" means a political committee organized
and maintained by the members of a major political party in the state senate or
state house of representatives.

(((10))) (9)
"Commercial advertiser" means any person who sells the service of
communicating messages or producing printed material for broadcast or
distribution to the general public or segments of the general public whether
through the use of newspapers, magazines, television and radio stations,
billboard companies, direct mail advertising companies, printing companies, or
otherwise.

(((11))) (10)
"Commission" means the agency established under RCW 42.17.350.

(((12))) (11)
"Compensation" unless the context requires a narrower meaning, includes
payment in any form for real or personal property or services of any kind:
PROVIDED, That for the purpose of compliance with RCW 42.17.241, the term
"compensation" shall not include per diem allowances or other
payments made by a governmental entity to reimburse a public official for
expenses incurred while the official is engaged in the official business of the
governmental entity.

(((13))) (12)
"Continuing political committee" means a political committee that is
an organization of continuing existence not established in anticipation of any
particular election campaign.

(((14))) (13)(a)
"Contribution" includes:

(i) A loan, gift,
deposit, subscription, forgiveness of indebtedness, donation, advance, pledge,
payment, transfer of funds between political committees, or anything of value,
including personal and professional services for less than full consideration;

(ii) An expenditure
made by a person in cooperation, consultation, or concert with, or at the
request or suggestion of, a candidate, a political committee, or their agents;

(iii) The financing by
a person of the dissemination, distribution, or republication, in whole or in
part, of broadcast, written, graphic, or other form of political advertising
prepared by a candidate, a political committee, or its authorized agent;

(iv) Sums paid for
tickets to fund-raising events such as dinners and parties, except for the
actual cost of the consumables furnished at the event.

(b)
"Contribution" does not include:

(i) Standard interest
on money deposited in a political committee's account;

(ii) Ordinary home
hospitality;

(iii) A contribution
received by a candidate or political committee that is returned to the
contributor within five business days of the date on which it is received by
the candidate or political committee;

(iv) A news item,
feature, commentary, or editorial in a regularly scheduled news medium that is
of primary interest to the general public, that is in a news medium controlled
by a person whose business is that news medium, and that is not controlled by a
candidate or a political committee;

(v) An internal
political communication primarily limited to the members of or contributors to
a political party organization or political committee, or to the officers,
management staff, or stockholders of a corporation or similar enterprise, or to
the members of a labor organization or other membership organization;

(vi) The rendering of
personal services of the sort commonly performed by volunteer campaign workers,
or incidental expenses personally incurred by volunteer campaign workers not in
excess of fifty dollars personally paid for by the worker. "Volunteer
services," for the purposes of this section, means services or labor for
which the individual is not compensated by any person;

(vii) Messages in the
form of reader boards, banners, or yard or window signs displayed on a person's
own property or property occupied by a person. However, a facility used for
such political advertising for which a rental charge is normally made must be
reported as an in-kind contribution and counts towards any applicable
contribution limit of the person providing the facility;

(viii) Legal or
accounting services rendered to or on behalf of:

(A) A political party
or caucus political committee if the person paying for the services is the
regular employer of the person rendering such services; or

(B) A candidate or an
authorized committee if the person paying for the services is the regular
employer of the individual rendering the services and if the services are
solely for the purpose of ensuring compliance with state election or public
disclosure laws.

(c) Contributions other
than money or its equivalent are deemed to have a monetary value equivalent to
the fair market value of the contribution. Services or property or rights
furnished at less than their fair market value for the purpose of assisting any
candidate or political committee are deemed a contribution. Such a
contribution must be reported as an in-kind contribution at its fair market
value and counts towards any applicable contribution limit of the provider.

(14)
"Depository" means a bank designated by a candidate or political
committee under RCW 42.17.050.

(15) "Elected
official" means any person elected at a general or special election to any
public office, and any person appointed to fill a vacancy in any such office.

(16)
"Election" includes any primary, general, or special election for
public office and any election in which a ballot proposition is submitted to
the voters: PROVIDED, That an election in which the qualifications for voting
include other than those requirements set forth in Article VI, section 1
(Amendment 63) of the Constitution of the state of Washington shall not be
considered an election for purposes of this chapter.

(17) "Election
campaign" means any campaign in support of or in opposition to a candidate
for election to public office and any campaign in support of, or in opposition
to, a ballot proposition.

(18) "Election
cycle" means the period beginning on the first day of December after the
date of the last previous general election for the office that the candidate
seeks and ending on November 30th after the next election for the office. In
the case of a special election to fill a vacancy in an office, "election
cycle" means the period beginning on the day the vacancy occurs and ending
on November 30th after the special election.

(19)
"Expenditure" includes a payment, contribution, subscription,
distribution, loan, advance, deposit, or gift of money or anything of value,
and includes a contract, promise, or agreement, whether or not legally
enforceable, to make an expenditure. The term "expenditure" also
includes a promise to pay, a payment, or a transfer of anything of value in
exchange for goods, services, property, facilities, or anything of value for
the purpose of assisting, benefiting, or honoring any public official or
candidate, or assisting in furthering or opposing any election campaign. For
the purposes of this chapter, agreements to make expenditures, contracts, and
promises to pay may be reported as estimated obligations until actual payment
is made. The term "expenditure" shall not include the partial or
complete repayment by a candidate or political committee of the principal of a
loan, the receipt of which loan has been properly reported.

(20) "Exploratory
period" means the period beginning on the day after a general election and
ending the day before the start of the qualifying period.

(21) "Expressly
advocates" means: (a) Conveying a communication containing a phrase such
as "vote for," "elect," "reelect,"
"support," "endorse," "cast your ballot for,"
"(name of candidate) in (year)," "(name of candidate) for
(office)," "vote against," "defeat,"
"reject," or a campaign slogan or words that in context can have no
reasonable meaning other than to advocate the election or defeat of one or more
clearly identified candidates; or (b) making a general public communication,
such as in a broadcast medium, newspaper, magazine, billboard, or direct mailer
referring to one or more clearly identified candidates and targeted to the
electorate of that candidate(s): (i) That in context can have no reasonable
meaning other than to advocate the election or defeat of the candidate(s), as
evidenced by factors such as the presentation of the candidate(s) in a
favorable or unfavorable light, the targeting, placement, or timing of the
communication, or the inclusion of statements of the candidate(s) or opponents,
or (ii) in the sixteen‑week period immediately before a general
election. A communication will not be considered as one that "expressly
advocates" merely because it presents information about the voting record
or position on a campaign issue of three or more candidates, so long as it is
not made in coordination with a candidate, political party, agent of the
candidate or party, or a person who is coordinating with a candidate or
candidate's agent.

(22) "Final
report" means the report described as a final report in RCW 42.17.080(2).

(((21))) (23)
"General election" means the election that results in the election of
a person to a state office. It does not include a primary.

(((22))) (24)
"General election period" means the period beginning on the day after
the primary election and ending on the day of the general election. For a
recall election, the "general election period" extends from the day
after the end of the qualifying period to the day of the recall election.

(25) "General
election spending limits" means amounts fifty percent greater than the
amounts specified as the primary election spending limits.

(26)
"Gift," is as defined in RCW 42.52.010.

(((23))) (27)
"Immediate family" includes the spouse, dependent children, and other
dependent relatives, if living in the household. For the purposes of RCW
42.17.640 through 42.17.790, "immediate family" means an individual's
spouse, and child, stepchild, grandchild, parent, stepparent, grandparent,
brother, half brother, sister, or half sister of the individual and the spouse
of any such person and a child, stepchild, grandchild, parent, stepparent,
grandparent, brother, half brother, sister, or half sister of the individual's
spouse and the spouse of any such person.

(((24))) (28)
"Independent expenditure" means an expenditure that has each of the
following elements:

(a) It is made in
support of or in opposition to a candidate for office by a person who is not
(i) a candidate for that office, (ii) an authorized committee of that candidate
for that office, (iii) a person who has received the candidate's encouragement
or approval to make the expenditure, if the expenditure pays in whole or in
part for political advertising supporting that candidate or promoting the
defeat of any other candidate or candidates for that office, or (iv) a person
with whom the candidate has collaborated for the purpose of making the
expenditure, if the expenditure pays in whole or in part for political
advertising supporting that candidate or promoting the defeat of any other
candidate or candidates for that office;

(b) The expenditure
pays in whole or in part for political advertising that either specifically
names the candidate supported or opposed, or clearly and beyond any doubt
identifies the candidate without using the candidate's name; and

(c) The expenditure,
alone or in conjunction with another expenditure or other expenditures of the
same person in support of or opposition to that candidate, has a value of five
hundred dollars or more. A series of expenditures, each of which is under five
hundred dollars, constitutes one independent expenditure if their cumulative
value is five hundred dollars or more.

(((25))) (29)(a)
"Intermediary" means an individual who transmits a contribution to a
candidate or committee from another person unless the contribution is from the
individual's employer, immediate family as defined for purposes of RCW
42.17.640 through 42.17.790, or an association to which the individual belongs.

(b) A treasurer or a
candidate is not an intermediary for purposes of the committee that the
treasurer or candidate serves.

(c) A professional
fund-raiser is not an intermediary if the fund-raiser is compensated for fund-raising
services at the usual and customary rate.

(d) A volunteer hosting
a fund-raising event at the individual's home is not an intermediary for
purposes of that event.

(((26))) (30)
"Legislation" means bills, resolutions, motions, amendments, nominations,
and other matters pending or proposed in either house of the state legislature,
and includes any other matter that may be the subject of action by either house
or any committee of the legislature and all bills and resolutions that, having
passed both houses, are pending approval by the governor.

(((27))) (31)
"Lobby" and "lobbying" each mean attempting to influence
the passage or defeat of any legislation by the legislature of the state of
Washington, or the adoption or rejection of any rule, standard, rate, or other
legislative enactment of any state agency under the state Administrative
Procedure Act, chapter 34.05 RCW. Neither "lobby" nor
"lobbying" includes an association's or other organization's act of
communicating with the members of that association or organization.

(((28))) (32)
"Lobbyist" includes any person who lobbies either in his or her own
or another's behalf.

(((29))) (33)
"Lobbyist's employer" means the person or persons by whom a lobbyist
is employed and all persons by whom he or she is compensated for acting as a
lobbyist.

(((30))) (34)
"Nonparticipating candidate" means a candidate who does not become
certified as a participating candidate under section 102 of this act and the
authorized committee of the candidate.

(35) "Participating
candidate" means a candidate who becomes certified as a participating
candidate under section 102 of this act and the authorized committee of the
candidate.

(36)
"Person" includes an individual, partnership, joint venture, public
or private corporation, association, federal, state, or local governmental
entity or agency however constituted, candidate, committee, political
committee, political party, executive committee thereof, or any other
organization or group of persons, however organized.

(((31))) (37)
"Person in interest" means the person who is the subject of a record
or any representative designated by that person, except that if that person is
under a legal disability, the term "person in interest" means and
includes the parent or duly appointed legal representative.

(((32))) (38)
"Political advertising" includes any advertising displays, newspaper
ads, billboards, signs, brochures, articles, tabloids, flyers, letters, radio
or television presentations, or other means of mass communication, used for the
purpose of appealing, directly or indirectly, for votes or for financial or
other support in any election campaign.

(((33))) (39)
"Political committee" means any person (except a candidate or an
individual dealing with his or her own funds or property) having the
expectation of receiving contributions or making expenditures in support of, or
opposition to, any candidate or any ballot proposition.

(((34))) (40)
"Primary" means the procedure for nominating a candidate to state
office under chapter 29.18 or 29.21 RCW or any other primary for an election
that uses, in large measure, the procedures established in chapter 29.18 or
29.21 RCW.

(((35))) (41)
"Primary election spending limits" means: (a) For a candidate for
the legislature, ten thousand dollars; and (b) for a candidate for governor,
three hundred eighty thousand dollars.

(42) "Primary
period" means the nine‑week period ending on the day of the primary
election. There is no "primary period" for a recall election.

(43)
"Public office" means any federal, state, county, city, town, school
district, port district, special district, or other state political subdivision
elective office.

(((36))) (44)
"Public record" includes any writing containing information relating
to the conduct of government or the performance of any governmental or
proprietary function prepared, owned, used, or retained by any state or local
agency regardless of physical form or characteristics. For the office of the
secretary of the senate and the office of the chief clerk of the house of
representatives, public records means legislative records as defined in RCW
40.14.100 and also means the following: All budget and financial records;
personnel leave, travel, and payroll records; records of legislative sessions; reports
submitted to the legislature; and any other record designated a public record
by any official action of the senate or the house of representatives.

(((37))) (45)
"Qualifying period" means the period beginning on the first day of
August in the year before an election, for an election for governor, or on the
first day of January of an election year, for an election for legislator, and
ending on the close of the regular filing period for the office. For a recall
election, the "qualifying period" begins when the election is called
and lasts for thirty days.

(46)
"Recall campaign" means the period of time beginning on the date of
the filing of recall charges under RCW 29.82.015 and ending thirty days after
the recall election.

(((38))) (47)
"State legislative office" means the office of a member of the state
house of representatives or the office of a member of the state senate.

(((39))) (48)
"State office" means state legislative office or the office of
governor, lieutenant governor, secretary of state, attorney general,
commissioner of public lands, insurance commissioner, superintendent of public
instruction, state auditor, or state treasurer.

(((40))) (49)
"State official" means a person who holds a state office.

(((41))) (50)
"Surplus funds" mean, in the case of a political committee or
candidate, the balance of contributions that remain in the possession or
control of that committee or candidate subsequent to the election for which the
contributions were received, and that are in excess of the amount necessary to
pay remaining debts incurred by the committee or candidate prior to that
election. In the case of a continuing political committee, "surplus
funds" mean those contributions remaining in the possession or control of
the committee that are in excess of the amount necessary to pay all remaining
debts when it makes its final report under RCW 42.17.065.

(((42))) (51)
"Treasurer" and "deputy treasurer" mean the individuals
appointed by a candidate or political committee, under RCW 42.17.050, to
perform the duties specified in that section.

(52)
"Writing" means handwriting, typewriting, printing, photostating,
photographing, and every other means of recording any form of communication or
representation, including, but not limited to, letters, words, pictures,
sounds, or symbols, or combination thereof, and all papers, maps, magnetic or
paper tapes, photographic films and prints, motion picture, film and video
recordings, magnetic or punched cards, discs, drums, diskettes, sound
recordings, and other documents including existing data compilations from which
information may be obtained or translated.

As used in this
chapter, the singular shall take the plural and any gender, the other, as the
context requires.

Sec. 119. RCW 34.05.310 and 1995 c
403 s 301 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) To meet the intent
of providing greater public access to administrative rule making and to promote
consensus among interested parties, agencies shall solicit comments from the
public on a subject of possible rule making before filing with the code reviser
a notice of proposed rule making under RCW 34.05.320. The agency shall prepare
a statement of inquiry that:

(a) Identifies the
specific statute or statutes authorizing the agency to adopt rules on this
subject;

(b) Discusses why rules
on this subject may be needed and what they might accomplish;

(c) Identifies other
federal and state agencies that regulate this subject, and describes the
process whereby the agency would coordinate the contemplated rule with these
agencies;

(d) Discusses the
process by which the rule might be developed, including, but not limited to,
negotiated rule making, pilot rule making, or agency study;

(e) Specifies the
process by which interested parties can effectively participate in the decision
to adopt a new rule and formulation of a proposed rule before its publication.

The statement of
inquiry shall be filed with the code reviser for publication in the state
register at least thirty days before the date the agency files notice of
proposed rule making under RCW 34.05.320 and shall be sent to any party that
has requested receipt of the agency's statements of inquiry.

(2) Agencies are
encouraged to develop and use new procedures for reaching agreement among
interested parties before publication of notice and the adoption hearing on a
proposed rule. Examples of new procedures include, but are not limited to:

(a) Negotiated rule
making by which representatives of an agency and of the interests that are
affected by a subject of rule making, including, where appropriate, county and
city representatives, seek to reach consensus on the terms of the proposed rule
and on the process by which it is negotiated; and

(b) Pilot rule making
which includes testing the feasibility of complying with or administering draft
new rules or draft amendments to existing rules through the use of volunteer
pilot groups in various areas and circumstances, as provided in RCW 34.05.313
or as otherwise provided by the agency.

(3)(a) An agency must
make a determination whether negotiated rule making, pilot rule making, or
another process for generating participation from interested parties prior to
development of the rule is appropriate.

(b) An agency must
include a written justification in the rule-making file if an opportunity for
interested parties to participate in the rule-making process prior to
publication of the proposed rule has not been provided.

(4) This section does
not apply to:

(a) Emergency rules
adopted under RCW 34.05.350;

(b) Rules relating only
to internal governmental operations that are not subject to violation by a
nongovernment party;

(c) Rules adopting or
incorporating by reference without material change federal statutes or
regulations, Washington state statutes, rules of other Washington state
agencies, shoreline master programs other than those programs governing
shorelines of statewide significance, or, as referenced by Washington state
law, national consensus codes that generally establish industry standards, if
the material adopted or incorporated regulates the same subject matter and
conduct as the adopting or incorporating rule;

(d) Rules that only
correct typographical errors, make address or name changes, or clarify language
of a rule without changing its effect;

(e) Rules the content
of which is explicitly and specifically dictated by statute;

(f) Rules that set or
adjust fees or rates pursuant to legislative standards; ((or))

(g) Rules that adopt,
amend, or repeal:

(i) A procedure,
practice, or requirement relating to agency hearings; or

(ii) A filing or
related process requirement for applying to an agency for a license or permit;
or

(h) Rules adopted
under section 113 of this act.

Sec. 120. RCW 42.36.040 and 1982 c
229 s 4 are each amended to read as follows:

Prior to declaring as a
candidate for public office or while campaigning for public office as defined
by RCW 42.17.020 (((5) and (25))) no public discussion or expression of
an opinion by a person subsequently elected to a public office, on any pending
or proposed quasi-judicial actions, shall be a violation of the appearance of
fairness doctrine.

PART II--POLITICAL ADVERTISING

Sec. 201. RCW 42.17.080 and 2000 c
237 s 2 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) On the day the
treasurer is designated, each candidate or political committee shall file a
report of all contributions received and expenditures made before that date, if
any, with the commission and the appropriate county ((auditor or))
elections officer ((of the county in which the candidate resides, or in the
case of a political committee, the county in which the treasurer resides)),
as specified under section 204 of this act. This report is in addition
to any statement of organization required under RCW 42.17.040 or 42.17.050((,
a report of all contributions received and expenditures made prior to that
date, if any)).

(2) At the following
intervals each ((treasurer)) candidate or political committee
shall file a report containing the information and requirements of RCW
42.17.090 with the commission and the appropriate county ((auditor
or)) elections officer ((of the county in which the candidate resides,
or in the case of a political committee, the county in which the committee
maintains its office or headquarters, and if there is no office or headquarters
then in the county in which the treasurer resides, a report containing the
information required by RCW 42.17.090)), as specified under section 204
of this act:

(a) On the twenty-first
day and the seventh day immediately preceding the date on which the election is
held; and

(b) On the tenth day of
the first month after the election((: PROVIDED, That)), but this
report ((shall)) is not ((be)) required following a
primary ((election)) from:

(i) A candidate whose
name will appear on the subsequent general election ballot; or

(ii) Any continuing
political committee; and

(c) On the tenth day of
each month in which no other reports are required to be filed under this
section((: PROVIDED, That such)).

However, the
report ((shall only)) required by this subsection (2) must be
filed only if the candidate or political committee has received a
contribution or made an expenditure in the preceding calendar month and either
the total contributions received or total expenditures made since the last such
report exceed two hundred dollars.

The candidate or
political committee shall file a final report with the commission and the
appropriate county elections officer, as specified under section 204 of this
act, when there is no outstanding debt or obligation, and all the ((campaign
fund is)) candidate's or political committee's accounts are closed,
and either the candidate's campaign is concluded in all respects,
((and)) or in the case of a political committee, the committee
has ceased to function and has dissolved((, the treasurer shall file a final
report)). Upon submitting a final report, the duties of the treasurer
shall cease and there shall be no obligation to make any further reports.

The report filed
twenty-one days before the election ((shall)) by a candidate, or by a
political committee that has not made a political advertisement relating to a
candidate undertaken as an independent expenditure, must report all
contributions received and expenditures made as of the end of the fifth ((business))
day before the date of the report. The report filed twenty-one days before
the election by a political committee that made a political advertisement
relating to a candidate undertaken as an independent expenditure must report
all contributions received and expenditures made as of the end of the last business
day before the date of the report. The report filed seven days before the
election ((shall)) by a candidate or political committee must
report all contributions received and expenditures made as of the end of the ((one
business)) day before the date of the report. Reports filed on the tenth
day of the month shall report all contributions received and expenditures made
from the closing date of the last report filed through the last day of the
month preceding the date of the current report.

(3) For the period
beginning the first day of the fourth month preceding the date on which the ((special
or general)) election is held and ending on the date of that election, each
Friday the ((treasurer)) candidate or political committee shall
file with the commission and the appropriate county elections officer, as
specified under section 204 of this act, a report of each ((bank deposit
made)) contribution received during the previous seven calendar
days. ((The report shall contain the name of each person contributing the
funds so deposited and the amount contributed by each person. However,
contributions of no more than twenty-five dollars in the aggregate from any one
person may be deposited without identifying the contributor.))

(4) A copy of ((the))
each report ((shall)) required to be filed by a candidate or
political committee under this chapter must be retained by the treasurer ((for
his or her)) as part of the candidate's or political committee's
records. ((In the event of deposits made by a deputy treasurer, the copy
shall be forwarded to the treasurer for his or her records. Each report shall
be certified as correct by the treasurer or deputy treasurer making the
deposit.

(4))) (5) If a city requires that candidates
or committees for city offices file reports with a city agency, the candidate
or treasurer so filing need not also file the report with the county ((auditor
or)) elections officer.

(((5) The treasurer
or)) (6) The candidate or political committee shall ((maintain))
have books of account maintained that accurately ((reflecting))
reflect all contributions and expenditures on a current basis within ((five
business days)) one day of receipt or expenditure. During the eight
days immediately preceding the date of the election the books of account ((shall))
for a candidate, and a political committee that has not made a political
advertisement relating to a candidate as an independent expenditure, must
be kept current within one ((business)) day. As specified in the
committee's statement of organization filed under RCW 42.17.040, the books of
account must be open for public inspection as follows:

(a) For at least two
consecutive hours between 8:00 a.m. and 8:00 p.m. on the eighth day immediately
before the election, except when it is a legal holiday, in which case on the
seventh day immediately before the election, at the principal headquarters or,
if there is no headquarters, at the address of the treasurer or such other
place as may be authorized by the commission; and

(b) By appointment for
inspections to be conducted at the designated place for inspections between
8:00 a.m. and 8:00 p.m. on any other day from the seventh day through the day
immediately before the election, other than Saturday, Sunday, or a legal
holiday. It is a violation of this chapter for a candidate or political
committee to refuse to allow and keep an appointment for an inspection to be
conducted during these authorized times and days in the week prior to the
election. The appointment must be allowed at an authorized time and day for
such inspections that is within twenty-four hours of the time and day that is
requested for the inspection.

(((6))) (7)
During the twenty-one days immediately before the date of an election, a
political committee that made a political advertisement relating to a candidate
undertaken as an independent expenditure shall keep its books of account
current within one business day and shall keep them open for public inspection
for at least two consecutive hours Monday through Friday, excluding legal
holidays, between 8:00 a.m. and 8:00 p.m., as specified in the committee's
statement of organization filed under RCW 42.17.040, at the principal
headquarters or, if there is no headquarters, at the address of the treasurer
or such other place as may be authorized by the commission.

(8) The ((treasurer
or)) candidate or political committee shall preserve books of
account, bills, receipts, and all other financial records of the campaign or
political committee for not less than five calendar years following the year
during which the transaction occurred.

(((7) All reports
filed pursuant to subsection (1) or (2) of this section shall be certified as
correct by the candidate and the treasurer.

(8))) (9) Copies of all reports filed
pursuant to this section shall be readily available for public inspection for
at least two consecutive hours Monday through Friday, excluding legal holidays,
between 8:00 a.m. and 8:00 p.m., as specified in the committee's statement of
organization filed pursuant to RCW 42.17.040, at the principal headquarters or,
if there is no headquarters, at the address of the treasurer or such other
place as may be authorized by the commission.

(((9))) (10)
After January 1, 2002, a report that is filed with the commission
electronically need not also be filed with the county ((auditor or))
elections officer.

(((10)))
(11) The commission shall adopt administrative rules establishing
requirements for filer participation in any system designed and implemented by
the commission for the electronic filing of reports.

Sec. 202. RCW 42.17.065 and 2000 c
237 s 1 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) In addition to the
provisions of this section, a continuing political committee shall file and
report on the same conditions and at the same times as any other committee in
accordance with the provisions of RCW 42.17.040, 42.17.050, and 42.17.060.

(2) A continuing
political committee shall file with the commission and the ((auditor or))
appropriate county elections officer ((of the county in which the
committee maintains its office or headquarters and if there is no such office
or headquarters then in the county in which the committee treasurer resides)),
as provided under section 204 of this act, a report on the tenth day of the
month detailing its activities for the preceding calendar month in which the
committee has received a contribution or made an expenditure((: PROVIDED,
That such report shall only)). However, the report must be filed only
if either the total contributions received or total expenditures made since the
last such report exceed two hundred dollars((: PROVIDED FURTHER, That)).
After January 1, 2002, if the committee files with the commission
electronically, it need not also file with the county ((auditor or))
elections officer. The report ((shall)) must be on a form
supplied by the commission and ((shall)) include the following
information:

(a) The information and
requirements required by RCW 42.17.090;

(b) Each expenditure
made to retire previously accumulated debts of the committee; identified by
recipient, amount, and date of payments;

(c) Such other
information as the commission ((shall)) prescribes by rule
prescribe.

(3) If a continuing
political committee ((shall)) makes a contribution in support of
or in opposition to a candidate or ballot proposition within sixty days ((prior
to)) before the date on which ((such)) the candidate
or ballot proposition will be voted upon, ((such)) the continuing
political committee shall report ((pursuant to)) under RCW
42.17.080.

(4) A continuing
political committee shall file reports as required by this chapter until it is
dissolved, at which time a final report shall be filed. Upon submitting a
final report, the duties of the ((campaign)) committee treasurer
((shall)) cease and there ((shall be)) is no obligation to
make any further reports.

(5) The ((campaign))
committee treasurer shall maintain books of account accurately
reflecting all contributions and expenditures on a current basis within ((five
business days)) one day of receipt or expenditure. During the eight
days immediately preceding the date of any election, for which the continuing
political committee has received any contributions or made any expenditures,
the books of account ((shall)) must be kept current within one ((business))
day and ((shall)) must be open for public inspection in the same
manner as provided for candidates and other political committees in RCW
42.17.080(((5))) (6). In addition, a continuing political
committee may be subject to additional requirements provided under RCW
42.17.080.

(6) All reports filed
((pursuant to)) under this section ((shall)) must
be certified as correct by the ((campaign)) committee treasurer.

(7) The ((campaign))
committee treasurer shall preserve books of account, bills, receipts,
and all other financial records of the campaign or political committee for not
less than five calendar years following the year during which the transaction
occurred.

Sec. 203. RCW 42.17.090 and 1993 c
256 s 6 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) Each report
required under RCW 42.17.065, 42.17.080 (((1) and (2) shall)),
and 42.17.135 must disclose the following:

(a) The funds on hand
at the beginning of the period;

(b) The name and
address of each person who has made one or more contributions during the
period, together with the money value and date of such contributions and the
aggregate value of all contributions received from each such person during the
campaign or in the case of a continuing political committee, the current
calendar year((: PROVIDED, That)). However, (i) pledges in the
aggregate of less than one hundred dollars from any one person need not be
reported((: PROVIDED FURTHER, That the)); (ii) income which
results from a fund-raising activity conducted in accordance with RCW 42.17.067
may be reported as one lump sum, with the exception of that portion of such
income which was received from persons whose names and addresses are required
to be included in the report required by RCW 42.17.067((: PROVIDED FURTHER,
That)); (iii) contributions of no more than twenty-five dollars in
the aggregate from any one person during the election campaign may be reported
as one lump sum so long as the campaign treasurer maintains a separate and
private list of the name, address, and amount of each such contributor((:
PROVIDED FURTHER, That)); and (iv) the money value of contributions
of postage shall be the face value of such postage;

(c) Each loan,
promissory note, or security instrument to be used by or for the benefit of the
candidate or political committee made by any person, together with the names
and addresses of the lender and each person liable directly, indirectly,
or contingently and the date and amount of each such loan, promissory note, or
security instrument;

(d) All other
contributions not otherwise listed or exempted;

(e) The name and
address of each candidate or political committee to which any transfer of funds
was made, together with the amounts and dates of such transfers;

(f) The name and
address of each person to whom an expenditure was made in the aggregate amount
of more than fifty dollars during the period covered by this report, and the
amount, date, and purpose of each such expenditure. A candidate for state ((executive
or state legislative)) office ((or the political committee of such a
candidate)) shall report this information for an expenditure under one of
the following categories, whichever is appropriate: (i) Expenditures for the
election of the candidate; (ii) expenditures for nonreimbursed public
office-related expenses; (iii) expenditures required to be reported under (e)
of this subsection; or (iv) expenditures of surplus funds and other
expenditures. The report of such a candidate or committee shall contain a
separate total of expenditures for each category and a total sum of all
expenditures. Other candidates and political committees need not report
information regarding expenditures under the categories listed in (i) through
(iv) of this subsection or under similar such categories unless required to do
so by the commission by rule. The report of such an other candidate or
committee shall also contain the total sum of all expenditures;

(g) The name and
address of each person to whom any expenditure was made directly or indirectly
to compensate the person for soliciting or procuring signatures on an
initiative or referendum petition, the amount of such compensation to each such
person, and the total of the expenditures made for this purpose. Such
expenditures shall be reported under this subsection (1)(g) whether the
expenditures are or are not also required to be reported under (f) of this
subsection;

(h) The name and
address of any person and the amount owed for any debt, obligation, note,
unpaid loan, or other liability in the amount of more than two hundred fifty
dollars or in the amount of more than fifty dollars that has been outstanding
for over thirty days;

(i) The surplus or
deficit of contributions over expenditures;

(j) The disposition
made in accordance with RCW 42.17.095 of any surplus funds;

(k) Such other
information as shall be required by the commission by rule in conformance with
the policies and purposes of this chapter; and

(l) Funds received from
a political committee not otherwise required to report under this chapter (a
"nonreporting committee"). Such funds shall be forfeited to the
state of Washington unless the nonreporting committee has filed or within ten
days following such receipt files with the commission a statement disclosing:
(i) Its name and address; (ii) the purposes of the nonreporting committee;
(iii) the names, addresses, and titles of its officers or if it has no officers,
the names, addresses, and titles of its responsible leaders; (iv) the name,
office sought, and party affiliation of each candidate in the state of
Washington whom the nonreporting committee is supporting, and, if such
committee is supporting the entire ticket of any party, the name of the party;
(v) the ballot proposition supported or opposed in the state of Washington, if
any, and whether such committee is in favor of or opposed to such proposition;
(vi) the name and address of each person residing in the state of Washington or
corporation which has a place of business in the state of Washington who has
made one or more contributions in the aggregate of more than twenty-five
dollars to the nonreporting committee during the current calendar year,
together with the money value and date of such contributions; (vii) the name
and address of each person in the state of Washington to whom an expenditure
was made by the nonreporting committee on behalf of a candidate or political
committee in the aggregate amount of more than fifty dollars, the amount, date,
and purpose of such expenditure, and the total sum of such expenditures; (viii)
such other information as the commission may prescribe by rule, in keeping with
the policies and purposes of this chapter. A nonreporting committee incurring
an obligation to file additional reports in a calendar year may satisfy the
obligation by filing with the commission a letter providing updating or
amending information.

(2) Both the
treasurer and the candidate, or the chief officer or leader for a political
committee, shall certify the correctness of each report.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
204. A new section is added
to chapter 42.17 RCW to read as follows:

Every statement of
organization, report, or other filing required by this chapter to be filed by a
candidate or political committee must be filed with the commission and the
appropriate county elections officer. The appropriate county elections officer
for a candidate is the county auditor or other elections officer of the county
in which the candidate resides. The appropriate county elections officer for a
political committee is the county auditor or other elections officer of the
county in which the committee maintains its office or headquarters, and if
there is no office or headquarters, then in the county in which the treasurer
resides.

Sec. 205. RCW 42.17.510 and 1995 c
397 s 19 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) All written
political advertising, whether relating to candidates or ballot propositions,
shall include the sponsor's name and address. All radio and television
political advertising, whether relating to candidates or ballot propositions,
shall include the sponsor's name. The use of an assumed name shall be
unlawful. The party with which a candidate files shall be clearly identified
in political advertising for partisan office.

(2) In addition ((to
the materials required by subsection (1) of this section)), all political
advertising relating to a candidate undertaken as an independent
expenditure ((by a person or entity other than a party organization))
must include the following statement on the communication "NOTICE TO
VOTERS (Required by law): This advertisement is an independent expenditure
of funds not authorized or approved by any candidate. There are no
limits on the amount of independent expenditures that may be made or on the
amount of any contribution for an independent expenditure. It is paid for
by (name, address, city, state)." If ((the)) an
advertisement relating to a candidate undertaken as an independent
expenditure is undertaken by a nonindividual ((other than a party
organization)), then the notice must (a) disclose the general nature of
the interests represented by the nonindividual, as determined by the commission
under section 206 of this act, immediately after the name of the nonindividual;
and (b) include the following notation ((must also be included)):
"Top Five Contributors," followed by a listing of the name((s))
of each of the five ((persons)) individuals or entities
making the largest contributions reportable under this chapter during the
twelve-month period before the date of the advertisement. The nature of
interests represented by each entity making such a contribution, as determined
by the commission under section 206 of this act, must be disclosed immediately
after the name of the entity.

(3) The statements and
listings of contributors required by ((subsections (1) and (2) of)) this
section shall:

(a) Appear on the first
page or fold of the written communication in at least ten-point type, or in
type at least ten percent of the largest size type used in a written
communication directed at more than one voter, such as a billboard or poster,
whichever is larger;

(b) Not be subject to
the half-tone or screening process;

(c) Be set apart from
any other printed matter; and

(d) Be clearly spoken
on any broadcast advertisement.

(4) Political yard
signs are exempt from the requirement of ((subsections (1) and (2) of))
this section that the name and address of the sponsor of political advertising
be listed on the advertising. In addition, the ((public disclosure))
commission shall, by rule, exempt from the identification requirements of ((subsections
(1) and (2) of)) this section forms of political advertising such as
campaign buttons, balloons, pens, pencils, sky-writing, inscriptions, and other
forms of advertising where identification is impractical.

(((5))) For the
purposes of this section, "yard sign" means any outdoor sign with
dimensions no greater than eight feet by four feet.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
206. A new section is added
to chapter 42.17 RCW to read as follows:

The commission shall
assign a brief descriptive phrase indicating the general nature of interests
represented by each nonindividual paying for advertisements relating to a
candidate undertaken as independent expenditures. As provided under RCW
42.17.510, this phrase must be included immediately after the name of the
nonindividual in each advertisement relating to a candidate that the
nonindividual undertakes as an independent contribution.

The commission shall
assign a brief descriptive phrase indicating the general nature of interests
represented by each entity making a contribution to a nonindividual for
advertisements relating to a candidate that are undertaken as independent
expenditures. As provided under RCW 42.17.510, this phrase must be included immediately
after the name of each entity listed as one of the top five contributors to the
nonindividual making the advertisement.

Sec. 207. RCW 42.17.040 and 1989 c
280 s 2 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) Every political
committee, within two weeks after its organization or, within two weeks after
the date when it first has the expectation of receiving contributions or making
expenditures in any election campaign, whichever is earlier, shall file a
statement of organization with the commission and with the county auditor or
elections officer of the county in which the candidate resides, or in the case
of any other political committee, the county in which the treasurer resides. A
political committee organized within the last three weeks before an election
and having the expectation of receiving contributions or making expenditures
during and for that election campaign shall file a statement of organization
within three ((business)) days after its organization or when it first
has the expectation of receiving contributions or making expenditures in the
election campaign.

(2) The statement of
organization shall include but not be limited to:

(a) The name and
address of the committee;

(b) The names and
addresses of all related or affiliated committees or other persons, and the
nature of the relationship or affiliation;

(c) The names,
addresses, and titles of its officers; or if it has no officers, the names,
addresses, and titles of its responsible leaders;

(d) The name and
address of its treasurer and depository;

(e) A statement whether
the committee is a continuing one;

(f) The name, office
sought, and party affiliation of each candidate whom the committee is
supporting or opposing, and, if the committee is supporting the entire ticket
of any party, the name of the party;

(g) The ballot
proposition concerned, if any, and whether the committee is in favor of or
opposed to such proposition;

(h) The general
nature of the interest or interests represented by the political committee;

(i) What
distribution of surplus funds will be made, in accordance with RCW 42.17.095,
in the event of dissolution;

(((i))) (j)
The street address of the place and the hours during which the committee will
make available for public inspection its books of account and all reports filed
in accordance with RCW 42.17.080; and

(((j))) (k)
Such other information as the commission may ((by regulation)) prescribe
by rule, in keeping with the policies and purposes of this chapter.

(3) Any material change
in information previously submitted in a statement of organization shall be
reported to the commission and to the appropriate county elections officer
within the ten days following the change.

Sec. 208. RCW 42.17.105 and 1995 c
397 s 4 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) ((Campaign
treasurers)) During the special reporting period for a candidate, a
candidate shall prepare and deliver to the commission and the
appropriate county elections officer, as specified under section 204 of this
act, a special report regarding any contribution or an aggregate of
contributions ((which:)) that is received from a single person if the
contribution or aggregate of contributions exceeds five hundred dollars((;
is from a single person or entity; and is received during a special reporting
period)).

((Any)) During
the special reporting period for a political committee, a political
committee ((making)) shall prepare and deliver to the commission and
the appropriate county elections officer, as specified under section 204 of
this act, a special report regarding a contribution or an aggregate of
contributions it makes to a single ((entity which)) candidate
or political committee if the contribution or an aggregate of contributions
exceeds five hundred dollars ((shall also prepare and deliver to the
commission the special report if the contribution or aggregate of contributions
is made during a special reporting period)). During the special
reporting period for a political committee, a candidate or political committee
that receives a contribution or an aggregate of contributions from a single
person that exceeds five hundred dollars, shall prepare and deliver a special
report on the contribution or contributions to the commission and the
appropriate county elections officer, as specified under section 204 of this
act.

For the purposes of
subsections (1) through (7) of this section:

(a) Each of the
following intervals is a special reporting period for a candidate or an authorized
committee: (i) The interval beginning after the period covered by the last
report required by RCW 42.17.080 and 42.17.090 to be filed before a primary and
concluding on the end of the day before that primary; and (ii) the interval
composed of the twenty-one days preceding a general election and concluding
on the end of the day before that general election; ((and))

(b) Each of the
following intervals is a special reporting period for any other political
committee: (i) The interval composed of forty days before a primary and the
end of the day before that primary; and (ii) the interval composed of forty
days before a general election and the end of the day before that general
election; and

(c) An aggregate
of contributions includes only those contributions received from a single ((entity))
person during any one special reporting period or made by the
contributing political committee to a single ((entity)) person
during any one special reporting period.

(2) If a ((campaign
treasurer)) candidate or political committee files a special report
under this section for one or more contributions received from a single ((entity))
person during a special reporting period, the ((treasurer)) candidate
or political committee shall also file a special report under this section
for each subsequent contribution of any size ((which)) that is
received from ((that entity)) the same person during the special
reporting period. If a political committee files a special report under this
section for a contribution or contributions made to a single ((entity)) candidate
or political committee during a special reporting period, the political
committee shall also file a special report for each subsequent contribution of
any size ((which)) that is made to ((that entity)) the
same candidate or political committee during the special reporting period.

(3) Except as provided
in subsection (4) of this section, the special report required by this section
shall be delivered to the commission electronically or in written form((,
including but not limited to mailgram, telegram, or nightletter)). The
special report required of a contribution recipient by subsection (1) of this
section shall be delivered to the commission and the appropriate county
elections officer within forty-eight hours of the time, or on the first
working day after: The contribution exceeding five hundred dollars is received
by the candidate or ((treasurer)) political committee; the
aggregate received by the candidate or ((treasurer)) political
committee first exceeds five hundred dollars; or the subsequent
contribution that must be reported under subsection (2) of this section is
received by the candidate or ((treasurer)) political committee.
The special report required of a contributor by subsection (1) of this section
or RCW 42.17.175 shall be delivered to the commission, the appropriate
county elections officer, and the candidate or political committee to whom
the contribution or contributions ((are)) were made, within
twenty-four hours of the time, or on the first working day after: The
contribution is made; the aggregate of contributions made first exceeds five
hundred dollars; or the subsequent contribution that must be reported under
subsection (2) of this section is made.

(4) The special report
may be transmitted orally by telephone to the commission to satisfy the
delivery period required by subsection (3) of this section if the written form
of the report is also mailed to the commission and postmarked within the
delivery period established in subsection (3) of this section or the file
transfer date of the electronic filing is within the delivery period
established in subsection (3) of this section.

(5) The special report
shall include at least:

(a) The amount of the
contribution or contributions;

(b) The date or dates
of receipt;

(c) The name and
address of the donor;

(d) The name and
address of the recipient; ((and))

(e) The nature of
the political committee, as determined under section 206 of this act; and

(f) Any other
information the commission may by rule require.

(6) Contributions
reported under this section shall also be reported as required by other
provisions of this chapter.

(7) The commission
shall prepare daily a summary of the special reports made under this section
and RCW 42.17.175.

(8) It is a violation
of this chapter for any person to make, or for any candidate ((or political
committee)) to accept from any one person, contributions reportable under
RCW 42.17.090 in the aggregate exceeding fifty thousand dollars for any ((campaign))
candidate for statewide office or exceeding five thousand dollars for any
other campaign subject to the provisions of this chapter within twenty-one days
of ((a general)) an election. ((This subsection does not
apply to contributions made by, or accepted from, a bona fide political party
as defined in this chapter, excluding the county central committee or
legislative district committee.))

(9) It is a
violation of this chapter for a person to make, or for any political committee
that undertakes political advertising relating to a candidate undertaken as an
independent expenditure to accept from any one person, contributions reportable
under RCW 42.17.090 in the aggregate exceeding twenty-five thousand dollars for
a statewide office or exceeding two thousand five hundred dollars for any other
campaign subject to this chapter within forty days of an election.

(10)
Contributions governed by this section include, but are not limited to,
contributions made or received indirectly through a third party or entity
whether the contributions are or are not reported to the commission as earmarked
contributions under RCW 42.17.135.

Sec. 209. RCW 42.17.175 and 1991 c
157 s 2 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) Any lobbyist
registered under RCW 42.17.150, any person who lobbies, and any lobbyist's
employer making a contribution or an aggregate of contributions to a single ((entity))
candidate, political committee, or bona fide political party that
exceeds five hundred dollars during a special reporting period before a primary
or general election, as such period is specified in RCW 42.17.105(1), shall
file one or more special reports for the contribution or aggregate of
contributions and for subsequent contributions made during that period under
the same circumstances and to the same extent that a contributing political
committee must file such a report or reports under RCW 42.17.105.

A person, other than
a political committee, who makes a contribution or aggregate of contributions
to a single candidate, political committee, or bona fide political party that exceeds
five thousand dollars during a special reporting period before a general
election, as that period is specified in RCW 42.17.105(1), shall file one or
more special reports for the contribution or aggregate of contributions and for
subsequent contributions made during that period under the same circumstances
and to the same extent that a contributing political committee must file such a
report or reports under RCW 42.17.105.

(2) Such a
special report shall be filed in the same manner provided under RCW 42.17.105
for a special report of a contributing political committee.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
210. A new section is added
to chapter 42.17 RCW to read as follows:

A copy of all political
advertising relating to candidates that is undertaken as an independent
expenditure, and the amount that has been spent to date and is proposed to be
spent on this independent expenditure, must be delivered to the commission at
least five days before the advertising is distributed or aired.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
211. A new section is added
to chapter 42.17 RCW to read as follows:

A county, city, or town
may establish a program where a candidate for a local elected office
voluntarily agrees to abide by limitations on the amount of money the
candidate, or the candidate's authorized committee, spends to campaign for the
office in return for receiving public matching funds from the county, city, or
town that are used to assist in funding his or her campaign.

PART III--CONTRIBUTIONS

Sec. 301. RCW 42.17.680 and 1993 c
2 s 8 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) No employer or
labor organization may increase the salary of an officer or employee, or give
an emolument to an officer, employee, or other person or entity, with the
intention that the increase in salary, or the emolument, or a part of it, be
contributed or spent to support or oppose a candidate, ((state)) elected
official against whom recall charges have been filed, political party, or
political committee.

(2) No employer or
labor organization may discriminate for or against an officer or employee
in the terms or conditions of employment for (a) ((the failure)) contributing
or failing to contribute to, (b) ((the failure)) in any way failing
to support or oppose, or (c) in any way supporting or opposing, a
candidate, elected official against whom recall charges have been filed,
ballot proposition, political party, or political committee.

(3) No employer or
other person or entity responsible for the disbursement of funds in payment of
wages or salaries may withhold or divert a portion of an employee's wages or
salaries for contributions to a candidate, elected official against whom
recall charges have been filed, ballot proposition, political party, or
political ((committees or for use as political contributions)) committee,
except upon the written request of the employee. The request must be made on a
form prescribed by the commission informing the employee of the prohibition
against employer and labor organization discrimination described in subsection
(2) of this section. The request is valid for no more than twelve months from
the date it is made by the employee.

(4) Each employer or
other person ((or entity)) who withholds contributions under
subsection (3) of this section shall maintain open for public inspection for a
period of no less than three years, during normal business hours, documents and
books of accounts that shall include a copy of each employee's request, the
amounts and dates funds were actually withheld, and the amounts and dates funds
were transferred to a candidate, political party, or political
committee. Copies of such information shall be delivered to the commission
upon request.

(5) A for-profit
corporation may not make contributions, directly or indirectly, to a candidate,
political party, or political committee, except through a separate fund made up
of money solicited expressly for political purposes.

PART IV--MISCELLANEOUS

NEW SECTION. Sec.
401. RCW 42.17.128 (Use of public
funds for political purposes) and 1993 c 2 s 24 are each repealed.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
402. Sections 101 through 117
of this act shall be known as the Citizens' Clean Elections Act.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
403. Sections 101 through 117
of this act are each added to chapter 42.17 RCW.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
404. Captions and part
headings used in this act are not part of the law.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 405. If any provision of this
act or its application to any person or circumstance is held invalid, the
remainder of the act or the application of the provision to other persons or
circumstances is not affected.

---
END ---