BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF
WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec.
1. The tremendous increases
in the costs of election campaigns, when coupled with recently enacted limits
on campaign contributions, creates a situation favoring the election of wealthy
candidates able to spend substantial amounts of their own resources for the
purpose of winning elections and those candidates who receive their
contributions from sources that have been able to proliferate to avoid, as a
practical matter, the contribution limits. In order to decrease the advantage
of a candidate's wealth or nimble contribution sources in election contests,
the legislature enacts this law directing the adoption of voluntary campaign
spending limits for state election contests and disclosure of those candidates who
agree to abide by the voluntary limits and those who do not.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
2. A new section is added
to chapter 42.17 RCW to read as follows:

(1) The public
disclosure commission shall adopt recommended spending limits for candidates
for the following offices: Governor, lieutenant governor, secretary of state,
treasurer, auditor, attorney general, commissioner of public lands, insurance
commissioner, superintendent of public instruction, member of the state senate,
and member of the state house of representatives. In adopting the recommended
spending limits, the commission shall consider the average expenditure amounts
for the candidates who received the highest and next highest number of votes in
the 2000 general elections for each office for which the commission is required
to recommend a spending limit. Unless the commission finds that these amounts
would be inappropriate or unrealistic or that adjustments in the amounts to
reflect geographic differences in legislative districts are warranted, the
commission shall base its recommended spending limits on the average
expenditure amounts.

(2) Beginning in 2004,
the commission shall biennially adjust the recommended spending limits adopted
under subsection (1) of this section based on changes in economic conditions as
reflected in the inflationary index used by the commission under RCW 42.17.370.

(3) Each candidate for
an office subject to a recommended spending limit may execute, and file with
the commission, a promise that the candidate will stay within the limit. A
candidate's promise that is executed and filed in conformance with this section
and with the rules adopted by the commission to implement this section is
binding on the candidate. A candidate who violates his or her promise to stay
within the voluntary spending limit is in violation of this chapter. The
commission shall remove the name of such a candidate from the list prepared
under subsection (5) of this section.

(4) The commission
shall prescribe the form that will be used for executing a promise under this
section. The promise must be filed not later than the tenth day after the
close of the filing period for the office.

(5) For each election
involving an office for which voluntary expenditure limits have been
established under this section, the commission shall compile a list of those
candidates who filed promises in a timely manner. The commission shall
promptly make the list available to the media and the public. The announcement
of its availability must be made by the executive director of the commission or
an employee designated by the chair of the commission to make such an
announcement. During an election campaign, the commission shall periodically
publish a list identifying each candidate who has executed a binding promise
under this section.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
3. A new section is added
to chapter 29.81 RCW to read as follows:

The secretary of state
shall add to each voters' pamphlet a list of the campaign spending limits
recommended by the public disclosure commission for each of the state offices
for which the statements of candidates appear in the pamphlet, a brief
explanation of the effect of a promise filed with the commission under section
2 of this act, and a brief description of sources of campaign finance
information.

In preparing the
voters' pamphlet for publication, the secretary of state shall secure from the
public disclosure commission its most current list of candidates who have
promised to limit spending, as that list is specified in section 2 of this
act. Using this list, the secretary shall add a prominent notice in the
candidates' pamphlet to accompany the statement or photograph of each person on
the list. The notice will state: "Has promised to abide by the voluntary
spending limit for this campaign." With the statement in the pamphlet of
each other candidate for state office, the secretary shall add a prominent
notice stating: "Has NOT promised to abide by the voluntary
spending limit for this campaign." The notice will accompany the
statement or photograph of each such other candidate.

For the purposes of
this section, "state office" means the offices listed in section 2(1)
of this act for which the public disclosure commission has adopted recommended
spending limits.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 4. This act takes effect
January 1, 2003.

---
END ---