BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF
WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1. RCW 46.37.100 and 1992 c
46 s 1 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) Front clearance
lamps and those marker lamps and reflectors mounted on the front or on the side
near the front of a vehicle shall display or reflect an amber color.

(2) Rear clearance
lamps and those marker lamps and reflectors mounted on the rear or on the sides
near the rear of a vehicle shall display or reflect a red color.

(3) All lighting
devices and reflectors mounted on the rear of any vehicle shall display or
reflect a red color, except the stop lamp or other signal device, which may be
red, amber, or yellow, and except that on any vehicle forty or more years old, or
on any motorcycle regardless of age, the taillight may also contain a blue
or purple insert of not more than one inch in diameter, and except that the
light illuminating the license plate shall be white and the light emitted by a
back-up lamp shall be white or amber.

--- END ---