BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF
WASHINGTON:

_4 NEW SECTION. Sec. 1. (1) A joint select
committee on climate

_5 change is established. The joint select committee shall
study and

_6 make recommendations to the legislature on the
potential:

_7 (a) Impacts of climate change in the state; and

_8 (b) Effects of early action by the state, before
action by the

_9 federal government or other state governments, on the
state's

10 competitive position with respect to other states.

11 (2) The joint select committee shall be composed of
fifteen

12 members as follows:

13 (a) One member of the senate from each of the two
major

14 political party caucuses in the senate, appointed by the
president

15 of the senate;

16 (b) One member of the house of representatives from
each of the

17 two major political parties in the house of
representatives,

18 appointed by the co-speakers of the house of
representatives;

p. 1 SHB
1921

_1 (c) Two members from the environmental community,
appointed by

_2 the president of the senate and the co-speakers of the
house of

_3 representatives;

_4 (d) Two members from the agriculture industry,
appointed by the

_5 president of the senate and the co-speakers of the house
of

_6 representatives;

_7 (e) Two members from the business community,
appointed by the

_8 president of the senate and the co-speakers of the house
of

_9 representatives; and

10 (f) One member from each of the following, appointed
by the

11 president of the senate and the co-speakers of the house
of

12 representatives: The timber industry, county
government, city

13 government, irrigation districts, and municipal water
purveyors.

14 (3) The members of the joint select committee shall
elect co-

15 chairs from among the committee members who are members
of the

16 legislature, each from a different political party. The
initial

17 meeting of the joint select committee shall be convened
by the

18 directive of the president of the senate and the
co-speakers of

19 the house of representatives. Staff support for the
joint select

20 committee shall be provided by senate committee services
and the

21 office of program research. Members of the committee
from the house

22 of representatives and the senate shall be compensated
for their

23 expenses as provided by the house of representatives and
the

24 senate.

25 (4) The joint select committee shall report its
interim

26 findings to the legislature regarding the issues
identified in

27 subsection (1) of this section by December 31, 2001.
The joint

28 select committee shall report final recommendations to
the

29 legislature regarding the issues identified in subsection
(1) of

30 this section by June 30, 2002.

31 NEW SECTION. Sec. 2. Section 1 of this act
expires July 1,

32 2002.

‑‑‑ END ‑‑‑

SHB 1921 p. 2