BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF
WASHINGTON:

_5 NEW SECTION. Sec. 1. The legislature makes
the following

_6 findings:

_7 (1) The overwhelming majority of scientific opinion,
as

_8 expressed in a recent consensus report of the world's
climate

_9 research community, has concluded that significant
climate change

10 arising from greenhouse gases generated by human
activity is

11 already underway.

12 (2) The best available analyses by northwest climate
experts

13 now indicate a projected doubling of carbon dioxide in
the

14 atmosphere is now expected to increase the average temperature
in

15 Washington state four to seven degrees over the next
fifty

16 years. This is the same amount of heating that normally
occurs over

17 a ten thousand to twenty thousand-year period and is
expected to

18 create:

p. 1 HB
1922

_1 (a) Substantial change in the timing, intensity, and

_2 distribution of the state's precipitation;

_3 (b) Substantial reduction in the state's total snow
pack;

_4 (c) A thirty to fifty-percent reduction of the
natural flow of

_5 the Columbia river during the summer; and

_6 (d) Significant sea level rise around the state,
including

_7 Puget Sound, for centuries to come.

_8 (3) Such changes are likely to have major, adverse
impacts on

_9 the state's: (a) Water supply; (b) ability to generate

10 hydroelectricity; (c) air quality; (d) transportation;
(e)

11 infectious diseases and public health; (f) agriculture;
(g)

12 forestry; (h) fisheries; (i) coastal infrastructure; (j)

13 recreation; and (k) all natural ecosystems including
designated

14 wilderness.

15 (4) Carbon dioxide, created by the burning of fossil
fuels, is

16 by far the largest source of disrupting greenhouse
gases. Current

17 trends indicate that, within fifty to one hundred years,
there

18 will be a doubling of atmospheric carbon dioxide over
the

19 preindustrial year of 1800. These trends, if left
unchecked, will

20 lead to a tripling and quadrupling of atmospheric carbon
dioxide

21 over the next century. Stabilizing the atmospheric
concentration at

22 twice the current level will require a worldwide capping
of the

23 growth of emissions within forty years with a reduction
of

24 emissions of over eighty percent thereafter.

25 (5) There has been a breakdown in global leadership
on this

26 issue and a response from the United States congress,
commensurate

27 with the risks associated here, is not currently
foreseeable. The

28 citizens of Washington state have consistently
demonstrated

29 extraordinary scientific, technological, visionary, and
creative

30 leadership. This kind of leadership is necessary to
successfully

31 engage the entire global community in addressing climate

32 change. Consequently, the state of Washington shall
strive to emit

33 no net greenhouse gas emissions by the year 2020.

34 (6) The citizens of Washington state are being asked
to host an

35 enormous number of new fossil fuel power plants that
will increase

36 the state's total greenhouse gas emissions by over
thirty percent

37 within the next few years. These plants are projected
to emit the

HB 1922 p. 2

_1 equivalent emissions of five and one-half million cars.
Over eighty-

_2 six percent of the state's emissions of dangerous
greenhouse

_3 gases are from just two sectors, electricity and
transportation.

_4 (7) Polluters should normally be expected, as a cost
of doing

_5 business, to pay the cost to clean up or mitigate their
pollution,

_6 and that the failure to regulate pollution by greenhouse
gases

_7 will impact future generations for at least four hundred
years. The

_8 cost of mitigating greenhouse gas emissions from natural
gas

_9 plants and transportation is generally expected to cost
between

10 three and six percent of the price of the electricity
and

11 fuel. Mitigation costs from polluters can be used to
dramatically

12 develop and promote the large-scale availability of
cost-

13 effective, clean electricity and transportation in
Washington

14 state. For purposes of this subsection only,
"greenhouse gases"

15 shall include all gases identified for regulation, as of
January

16 1, 2001, by the United Nations framework convention on
climate

17 change.

18 NEW SECTION. Sec. 2. The definitions in
this section apply

19 throughout this chapter unless the context clearly
requires

20 otherwise.

21 (1) "Board" means the board of directors
of the Washington

22 climate center.

23 (2) "Center" means the Washington climate
center.

24 (3) "Climate change" means a change of climate
attributed

25 directly or indirectly to human activity that alters the

26 composition of the global atmosphere.

27 (4) "Emissions" means the release of
greenhouse gases.

28 (5) "Emitter" means the entity releasing
greenhouse gases. The

29 "emitter" for:

30 (a) Transportation fuels shall be that party which
sells the

31 fuel, not the purchaser; and

32 (b) Electricity produced outside of Washington
state, shall be

33 the wholesale seller.

34 (6) "Greenhouse gases" includes only the
following gases:

35 Carbon dioxide (CO2), methane and natural gas (CH4), and
nitrous

36 oxide (N2O). All carbon neutral emissions are exempt
from this

37 chapter, these are: Emissions of carbon dioxide from
sources that

p. 3 HB
1922

_1 originally captured the carbon from the atmosphere or
hydrosphere

_2 within the last five hundred years. This includes, but
is not

_3 limited to, human or animal respiration and the burning
of

_4 biofuels.

_5 (7) "Mitigate" emissions means to eliminate,
or capture-and-

_6 store, or to ensure the elimination or capturing and
storing of,

_7 greenhouse gases.

_8 (8) "Most cost-effective" means obtaining
the greatest

_9 reductions in greenhouse gases per dollar spent.

10 (9) "Permanent" mitigation means to avoid,
or remove,

11 greenhouse gases from the atmosphere for a period in
excess of two

12 hundred years.

13 (10) "Short-term" mitigation means to
avoid, or remove,

14 greenhouse gases from the atmosphere for a period of two
hundred

15 years or less.

16 NEW SECTION. Sec. 3. The state legislature
authorizes the

17 establishment of an independent, nonprofit organization
known as

18 the Washington climate center to serve as a central
clearinghouse

19 for all climate change activities in the state.

20 NEW SECTION. Sec. 4. The center shall be
funded through: (1)

21 Cash and in-kind contributions; and (2) administrative
fees for

22 services as provided in this chapter.

23 NEW SECTION. Sec. 5. (1) The activities of
the center shall be

24 directed by a board of directors selected by the
governor, for

25 terms of four years, beginning November 1, 2001. The
board shall

26 include no less than eleven members as follows:

27 (a) One member from the majority party of both the
house of

28 representatives and senate;

29 (b) One member from the minority party of both the
house of

30 representatives and senate;

31 (c) One member from the office of the commissioner
of public

32 lands;

33 (d) Two members from the nonprofit, climate sector;

34 (e) Two members from the business sector; and

35 (f) Two members from the climate academic sector.

HB 1922 p. 4

_1 (2) The board shall retain and assign staff and
volunteers as

_2 the board deems necessary. A vote of a majority of the
members of

_3 the board shall bind the board.

_4 NEW SECTION. Sec. 6. (1) The duties of the
center may

_5 include, but are not limited to:

_6 (a) Determining current and projected emissions of
greenhouse

_7 gases in the state;

_8 (b) Collecting and sharing scientific and
technological data

_9 related to climate change;

10 (c) Assisting and collecting all climate contingency
planning

11 in the state;

12 (d) Advising relevant sectors of prospective
commercial

13 opportunities;

14 (e) Studying and recommending, by January 30, 2002,
avenues

15 capping the total amount of greenhouse gas emissions in
the state

16 by December 31, 2003;

17 (f) Studying and recommending, by June 30, 2002, the
most cost-

18 effective methods for eliminating all net greenhouse gas
emissions

19 in the state by December 31, 2020;

20 (g) Studying and recommending, by January 1, 2002,
the most

21 cost-effective methods for reducing greenhouse gas
emissions from

22 the transportation sector consistent with federal law;

23 (h) Certifying the extent and degree of mitigation
projects;

24 (i) Ensuring adequate monitoring and verification of
mitigation

25 projects;

26 (j) Serving as a central, independent registry for
the trading

27 of emissions credits; and

28 (k) Submitting a report of progress to the
legislature by

29 December 31st of each year.

30 (2) The center shall:

31 (a) Draft and publish its rules of operation,
calculations, and

32 methods;

33 (b) Accomplish any other duty assigned to it by the
legislature

34 for which adequate funding is provided; and

35 (c) Provide an annual report to the governor and
legislature by

36 December 31st regarding the implementation of this
chapter.

37 (3) The center may also:

p. 5 HB
1922

_1 (a) Identify key sectors within the state likely to
be affected

_2 adversely by climate change;

_3 (b) Notify and convene meetings of key members of
those

_4 sectors;

_5 (c) Provide relevant scientific and technological
information

_6 to the public and key sectors;

_7 (d) Support a collaborative response to assist those
sectors;

_8 and

_9 (e) Assist in the creation of effective contingency
planning

10 for those sectors.

11 (4) The following agencies and programs shall work
with the

12 center to establish contingency planning under
subsection (3) of

13 this section: The department of community, trade, and
economic

14 development, the department of ecology, the department
of

15 transportation, and the Washington State University
energy

16 program.

17 NEW SECTION. Sec. 7. (1) All emitters of
greenhouse gases from

18 the production of electricity and the burning of
transportation

19 fuels are required to mitigate their emissions effective
January

20 1, 2002.

21 (2) Emissions of greenhouse gases from all other
sectors,

22 including, but not limited to, agriculture, aluminum,
cement,

23 forestry, natural gas for heating, and solid waste are
exempt from

24 the provisions of this chapter through the year 2006.
The board may

25 extend all or part of the exemption if it believes the
state can

26 attain a level of no net greenhouse gas emissions by the
year 2020

27 without directly addressing emissions from those
sectors.

28 (3) Emitters shall either: (a) Secure their own
mitigation

29 projects; or (b) remit the cost of mitigation to the
center for

30 selection of mitigation projects. Any and all emissions
credits

31 earned as a result of mitigation secured through the
center shall

32 be owned by the citizens of the state of Washington, not
the

33 emitter.

34 (4) While emitters may support mitigation projects
outside the

35 state of Washington, for purposes of this chapter, only
those

36 mitigation projects located within the state of
Washington shall

37 qualify as mitigating emissions.

HB 1922 p. 6

_1 (5) The center shall:

_2 (a) Determine and certify the amount of mitigation
accomplished

_3 by any mitigation project;

_4 (b) Determine what, if any, monitoring and
verification is

_5 required for any mitigation project and assign the costs
of

_6 monitoring and verification to the emitter; and

_7 (c) For any mitigation projects not completed within
two

_8 calendar years of the calendar year of the emissions,
set a

_9 standard and discount the future value of projects
taking more

10 than two years to mitigate.

11 (6) All entities engaged in, or purchasing,
mitigation projects

12 shall remit to the center a sum equivalent to five
percent of the

13 cost of the mitigation projects for administrative
purposes.

14 NEW SECTION. Sec. 8. (1) To encourage
emitters to plan and

15 substitute clean technologies, any emitter choosing to
purchase

16 mitigation through the center for the years 2002 through
2005,

17 shall pay the following prices:

18 (a) For the year 2002 - two dollars per ton;

19 (b) For the year 2003 - three dollars per ton;

20 (c) For the year 2004 - four dollars per ton; and

21 (d) For the year 2005 - five dollars per ton.

22 (2)(a) By January 1st of every other year, beginning
in 2004,

23 the board shall recommend to the legislature: (i) The
price of

24 mitigation projects paid through the center effective
two years

25 thereafter, and (ii) what, if any, portion of the
mitigation funds

26 should be used for mitigation projects outside the state
of

27 Washington.

28 (b) In making its recommendations, the board shall
be guided by

29 the commitment that: (i) Washington state emit no net
greenhouse

30 gas emissions by the year 2020 or earlier, (b) the price
shall

31 increase by at least one dollar per year, and (c) clean
and

32 efficient technologies in Washington state shall be
supported.

33 (3) The center shall use all mitigation funds, not
including

34 administrative or verification fees, to purchase or
otherwise

35 secure the most cost-effective, permanent mitigation
projects

36 available within Washington state.

p. 7 HB
1922

_1 (4) To facilitate this transition, for calendar
years 2002

_2 through 2005, the center shall direct additional assistance
to the

_3 following sectors in Washington state as follows:

_4 (a) Seven and one-half percent of mitigation funds,
not

_5 including administrative or verification fees, to
support the most

_6 effective, short-term mitigation projects presented by
the

_7 forestry and agriculture sectors of Washington state;
and

_8 (b) Seven and one-half percent of all mitigation
funds, not

_9 including administrative or verification fees, to
support the most

10 effective proposals presented by the energy conservation
and

11 renewable energy sectors in Washington state that would
not

12 otherwise qualify on cost-competitive grounds under
subsection (3)

13 of this section.

14 (5) Effective January 2006, while additional or
continued

15 assistance may be provided to these sectors, that
assistance shall

16 in no way reduce, directly or indirectly, the complete
and full

17 permanent mitigation of emissions.

18 NEW SECTION. Sec. 9. Any person may
privately enforce in the

19 superior court any mandatory provision of this chapter
by: (1)

20 Giving the alleged violator written notice of the
allegation; and

21 (2) providing the alleged violator with forty-five days
to comply

22 with the terms of this chapter. If the alleged violator
still does

23 not appear to have complied with this chapter, any
person may

24 bring an action against the alleged violator. The
prevailing party

25 is entitled to costs and attorneys' fees.

26 NEW SECTION. Sec. 10. Sections 1 through 9
of this act

27 constitute a new chapter in Title 70 RCW.

28 NEW SECTION. Sec. 11. This act is
necessary for the immediate

29 preservation of the public peace, health, or safety, or
support of

30 the state government and its existing public
institutions, and

31 takes effect July 1, 2001.

‑‑‑ END ‑‑‑

HB 1922 p. 8