BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF
WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1. RCW 36.22.175 and 1996 c
245 s 1 are each amended to read as follows:

In addition to any
other charge authorized by law, the county auditor shall charge a surcharge of
one dollar per instrument for each document recorded. Revenue generated
through this surcharge shall be transmitted monthly to the state treasurer for
deposit in the archives and records management account. These funds shall be
used solely for providing records scheduling, security microfilm inspection and
storage, archival preservation, cataloging, and indexing for local government
records and access to those records through the regional branch archives
of the division of archives and records management. ((This section
shall expire June 30, 2001.))

NEW SECTION. Sec.
2. A new section is added
to chapter 36.22 RCW to read as follows:

(1) If there are
surplus moneys in the archives and records management account that are
attributable to local revenues under RCW 36.22.175 or 40.14.027, then the
secretary of state may:

(a) Provide records
management training for local government; and

(b) Establish a
competitive grant program for records management and archive projects of local
government as provided in subsection (2) of this section.

Total expenditures for
these purposes may not exceed four hundred thousand dollars in any fiscal
biennium. Any additional surplus moneys shall be used for construction or
improvement of specialized regional facilities designed to serve the archives
and records management needs of local governments.

(2)(a) The competitive
grant program shall solicit and prioritize projects for records management and
archive projects of local government. The state archivist may adopt rules
governing project eligibility, evaluation, awarding of grants, requirement of
records management training for grant recipients, and other criteria.

(b) By January 1st of
each even-numbered year, the advisory committee established in RCW 40.14.027
shall review grant proposals and establish a prioritized list of projects to be
considered for funding. The evaluation of proposals and development of the
prioritized list must be developed through open public meetings.

(c) Funding for
projects within the program shall be granted according to the ranking of each
application on the prioritized list, and projects may be funded only to the
extent moneys are available under subsection (1) of this section. A grant
award may have an effective date other than the date the project is placed on
the prioritized list.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
3. 1996 c 245 s 2
(uncodified) is repealed.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 4. This act is necessary for
the immediate preservation of the public peace, health, or safety, or support
of the state government and its existing public institutions, and takes effect
June 30, 2001.

---
END ---