BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF
WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1. RCW 36.22.175 and 1996 c
245 s 1 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) In addition to any other charge
authorized by law, the county auditor shall charge a surcharge of one dollar
per instrument for each document recorded. Revenue generated through this
surcharge shall be transmitted monthly to the state treasurer for deposit in
the archives and records management account. These funds shall be used solely
for providing records scheduling, security microfilm inspection and storage,
archival preservation, cataloging, and indexing for local government records and
digital data and access to those records and data through the regional
branch archives of the division of archives and records management. ((This
section shall expire June 30, 2001.))

The division of archives and records
management within the office of the secretary of state shall provide records
management training for local governments and shall establish a competitive
grant program to solicit and prioritize project proposals from local
governments for potential funding to be paid for by funds from the auditor
surcharge and tax warrant surcharge revenues. Application for specific
projects may be made by local government agencies only. The state archivist in
consultation with the advisory committee established under RCW 40.14.027 shall
adopt rules governing project eligibility, evaluation, awarding of grants, and
other criteria including requirements for records management training for grant
recipients.

(2) The advisory committee established
under RCW 40.14.027 shall review grant proposals and establish a prioritized
list of projects to be considered for funding by January 1st of each
even-numbered year, beginning in 2002. The evaluation of proposals and
development of the prioritized list must be developed through open public
meetings. Funding for projects shall be granted according to the ranking of
each application on the prioritized list and projects will be funded only to
the extent that funds are available. A grant award may have an effective date
other than the date the project is placed on the prioritized list.

(3) In addition to any other surcharge
authorized by law, the county auditor shall charge a surcharge of one dollar
per instrument for every document recorded after January 1, 2002. Revenue
generated through this surcharge shall be transmitted to the state treasurer
monthly for deposit in the archives and records management account to be used
exclusively for the construction and improvement of a specialized regional facility
located in eastern Washington designed to serve the archives, records
management, and digital data management needs of local government.

To the extent the facilities are used for
the storage and retrieval of state agency records and digital data, that
portion of the construction of such facilities used for state government
records and data shall be supported by other charges and fees paid by state
agencies and shall not be supported by the surcharge authorized in this
subsection.

At such time that all debt service from
construction on such facility has been paid, fifty percent of the surcharge
authorized by this subsection shall be reverted to the centennial document
preservation and modernization account as prescribed in RCW 36.22.170 and fifty
percent of the surcharge authorized by this section shall be reverted to the
state treasurer for deposit in the archives and records management account to
serve the archives, records management, and digital data management needs of
local government.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
2. 1996 c 245 s 2
(uncodified) is repealed.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 3. This act is necessary for
the immediate preservation of the public peace, health, or safety, or support
of the state government and its existing public institutions, and takes effect
June 30, 2001.

---
END ---