BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF
WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec.
1. This act may be known and
cited as the "Born Alive Infants Protection Act of 2001."

Sec. 2. RCW 18.71.240 and 1981 c
328 s 1 are each amended to read as follows:

The right of medical
treatment of an infant who is born alive in the course of an abortion ((procedure
shall be)) is the same as the right of an infant who is born
prematurely of equal gestational age.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
3. A new section is added
to chapter 18.71 RCW to read as follows:

In determining the
meaning or application of any state law, the words "child,"
"person," "individual," and "human being" shall
include every infant who is born alive at any stage of development.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
4. A new section is added
to chapter 18.71 RCW to read as follows:

For purposes of this
act, the following definitions apply:

(1)
"Abortion" means the use or prescription of any instrument, medicine,
drug, or other substance or device to terminate the pregnancy of a woman for
any other purpose than producing a live birth.

(2) "Born
alive" means the complete expulsion or extraction of an infant at any
stage of development from his or her mother, who after such expulsion or
extraction breathes or has a beating heart, pulsation of the umbilical cord, or
definite movement of voluntary muscles, regardless of whether or not the
umbilical cord has been cut, and regardless of whether or not the expulsion or
extraction occurs as a result of natural or induced labor, cesarean section, or
induced labor.

(3) "Infant"
means any member of the species homo sapiens who is born alive at any stage of
development.

(4) "Law"
means the state Constitution, any state statute or ordinance adopted by a
legislative body, and any state rule or regulation adopted by any executive
agency.

(5) "State"
means state and local government, and any political subdivision thereof, and
any officer, employee, agent, or volunteer thereof.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
5. A new section is added
to chapter 18.71 RCW to read as follows:

(1) Every facility
where births occur shall conspicuously post, in a prominent location where
births occur so that all employees and patrons of the facility may take notice,
the following warning sign, to be provided by the department of health, in
block letters at least one inch in height:

"AN
INFANT WHO IS BORN ALIVE HAS THE SAME RIGHTS AS ANY OTHER PERSON AND IS EQUALLY
PROTECTED BY THE LAW."

(2) Every facility
where abortions occur shall conspicuously post, in a prominent location where
abortions occur so that all employees and patrons of the facility may take
notice, the following warning sign, to be provided by the department of health,
in block letters at least one inch in height:

"THE
RIGHT OF MEDICAL TREATMENT OF AN INFANT WHO IS BORN ALIVE IN THE COURSE OF AN
ABORTION IS THE SAME AS THE RIGHT OF AN INFANT WHO IS BORN PREMATURELY OF EQUAL
GESTATIONAL AGE."

(3) Every facility that
violates subsection (1) or (2) of this section is guilty of a class 3 civil
infraction under chapter 7.80 RCW and may be fined up to fifty dollars.
However, no such fines may be levied until thirty days have expired from the
time warning signs are distributed by the department of health.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
6. The provisions of this
act are to be liberally construed to effectuate the policies and purposes of
this act. In the event of conflict between this act and any other provision of
law, the provisions of this act shall govern.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
7. If any provision of this
act or its application to any person or circumstance is held invalid, the
remainder of the act or the application of the provision to other persons or
circumstances is not affected.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 8. This act is necessary for
the immediate preservation of the public peace, health, morals, or safety, or
support of the state government and its existing public institutions, and takes
effect immediately.

---
END ---