BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF
WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec.
1. The legislature finds
that:

(1) Brown and Haley has
been an integral part of our state's economy for over eighty years.

(2) Most of the
ingredients from Almond Roca7 Buttercrunch come from Washington manufacturers.

(3) Washington has a
state tree, grass, flower, fruit, bird, fossil, fish, insect, song, folk song,
and dance, but no state candy. Almond Roca7 is a holiday treat produced in the state and
enjoyed by people around the world.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
2. A new section is added
to chapter 1.20 RCW to read as follows:

Almond
Roca7
Buttercrunch is designated as the official candy of the state of Washington.

---
END ---