BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF
WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec.
1. The legislature finds
that:

(1) The greatest impact
on the community and with students is made when schools arrange and require
community service opportunities, 56.3% of students in grades six through twelve
did community service if it was arranged and required, compared to 18.9% if it
was only required.

(2) Thirty-two percent
of all public schools, including nearly half of all high schools, organized
community service as part of their curriculum.

(3) Eighty-three
percent of public high schools nationwide had students participating in
community service activities recognized by the schools.

(4) This legislation is
taken directly from Maryland legal code.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
2. A new section is added
to chapter 28A.230 RCW to read as follows:

Students
shall complete seventy-five hours of student service that includes preparation,
action, and reflection components and that, at the discretion of the local
school system, may begin during the middle grades; or a locally designed
program in student service that has been approved by the state superintendent
of public instruction. These requirements must be completed before graduation.

---
END ---