BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF
WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec.
1. The legislature finds
that:

(1) Every day three
thousand children become smokers, and one out of three will die from
nicotine-related causes.

(2) Two out of three
children from twelve to seventeen years of age who smoke show signs of
addiction.

(3) Nearly one in five
deaths in the United States are a result of tobacco use.

(4) The average age of
first tobacco use is eleven to fifteen years.

(5) Over three million
adolescents currently smoke.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
2. A new section is added
to chapter 28A.230 RCW to read as follows:

All
students in grades six through twelve shall receive no less than fifty minutes
of antismoking instruction on or before November 1st of each year.

---
END ---