BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF
WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1. RCW 90.58.080 and 1995 c
347 s 305 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) Local
governments shall develop or amend((, within twenty-four months after the
adoption of guidelines as provided in RCW 90.58.060,)) a master program for
regulation of uses of the shorelines of the state consistent with the required
elements of the guidelines adopted by the department. Except as provided in
subsection (2) of this section, master programs shall be reviewed and amended
as necessary for compliance with the guidelines and submitted to the department
for approval within twenty-four months after the adoption of guidelines as
provided in RCW 90.58.060.

(2) Consistent with
the priority salmon recovery regions identified in the statewide strategy to
recover salmon and population growth data provided by the office of financial
management, the following master program development or amendment schedule
applies for guidelines adopted by the department before December 31, 2000:

(a) For King,
Snohomish, Pierce, Clark, and Kitsap counties and the cities and towns therein
with shorelines of the state, master programs shall be reviewed and amended as
necessary for compliance with the guidelines and submitted to the department
for approval within thirty-six months after the adoption of guidelines as
provided in RCW 90.58.060;

(b) For Thurston,
Whatcom, Benton, Yakima, Skagit, Cowlitz, Clallam, Chelan, Mason, Lewis,
Jefferson, and Okanogan counties and the cities and towns therein with
shorelines of the state, master programs shall be reviewed and amended as
necessary for compliance with the guidelines and submitted to the department
for approval within forty-eight months after the adoption of guidelines as
provided in RCW 90.58.060;

(c) For all other
counties, cities, and towns with shorelines of the state, master programs shall
be reviewed and amended as necessary for compliance with the guidelines and
submitted to the department for approval within sixty months after the adoption
of guideline amendments as provided in RCW 90.58.060.

Sec. 2. RCW 90.58.250 and 1971
ex.s. c 286 s 25 are each amended to read as follows:

The department is
directed to cooperate fully with local governments in discharging their
responsibilities under this chapter. Funds shall be available for distribution
to local governments on the basis of applications for preparation of master
programs. Such applications shall be submitted in accordance with regulations
developed by the department. The department is authorized to make and
administer grants within appropriations authorized by the legislature to any
local government within the state for the purpose of developing a master
shorelines program.

((No
grant shall be made in an amount in excess of the recipient's contribution to
the estimated cost of such program.))

---
END ---