BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF
WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec.
1. A new section is added
to chapter 49.46 RCW to read as follows:

(1)(a) For the purposes
of this section, "tip" means:

(i) A sum presented
voluntarily by a customer to an employee as a gift or gratuity in recognition
of service performed for the customer; or

(ii) A sum paid by a
customer to a seller that is a mandatory addition to the selling price, whether
labeled a service charge, a tip, a gratuity, or otherwise, for service
performed for the customer.

(b) "Tip"
includes:

(i) A sum presented or
paid in legal tender of the United States or by check on a bank convertible
into cash on demand at full face value; or

(ii) A sum transferred
by the seller to an employee at the direction of credit customers who designate
amounts to be added to their bills as tips.

(2) When a customer
pays a tip to a seller, the seller must distribute the tip to employees as
follows:

(a) Through a tip
pooling arrangement mutually agreed upon by the employees;

(b) If a tip pooling
arrangement does not exist, then to the employee or employees who performed the
service; or

(c) If the employee or
employees who performed the service are not readily identifiable, then to the
employees who worked on the day the customer paid the tip.

(3) A tip may not be
used, in whole or in part, to satisfy the monetary requirements of RCW
49.46.020.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
2. A new section is added
to chapter 82.04 RCW to read as follows:

This chapter does not
apply to amounts paid or received as tips as defined in section 1 of this act.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
3. A new section is added
to chapter 82.08 RCW to read as follows:

The tax
levied by RCW 82.08.020 does not apply to amounts paid or received as tips as
defined in section 1 of this act.

---
END ---