BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF
WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1. RCW 90.46.005 and 1997 c
355 s 1 are each amended to read as follows:

The legislature finds
that by encouraging the use of reclaimed water while assuring the health and
safety of all Washington citizens and the protection of its environment, the
state of Washington will continue to use water in the best interests of present
and future generations.

To facilitate the use
of reclaimed water as soon as is practicable, the legislature encourages the
cooperative efforts of the public and private sectors and the use of pilot
projects to effectuate the goals of this chapter. The legislature further
directs the department of health and the department of ecology to coordinate
efforts towards developing an efficient and streamlined process for creating
and implementing processes for the use of reclaimed water.

It is hereby declared
that the people of the state of Washington have a primary interest in the
development of facilities to provide reclaimed water to replace potable water
in nonpotable applications, to supplement existing surface and ground water
supplies, and to assist in meeting the future water requirements of the state.

The legislature further
finds and declares that the utilization of reclaimed water by local communities
for domestic, agricultural, industrial, recreational, and fish and wildlife
habitat creation and enhancement purposes, including wetland enhancement, will
contribute to the peace, health, safety, and welfare of the people of the state
of Washington. To the extent reclaimed water is appropriate for beneficial
uses, it should be so used to preserve potable water for drinking purposes.
Use of reclaimed water constitutes the development of new basic water supplies
needed for future generations.

The legislature further
finds and declares that the use of reclaimed water is not inconsistent with the
policy of antidegradation of state waters announced in other state statutes,
including the water pollution control act, chapter 90.48 RCW and the water
resources act, chapter 90.54 RCW.

The legislature finds
that other states, including California, Florida, and Arizona, have
successfully used reclaimed water to supplement existing water supplies without
threatening existing resources or public health.

It is the intent of the
legislature that the department of ecology and the department of health
undertake the necessary steps to encourage the development of water reclamation
facilities so that reclaimed water may be made available to help meet the
growing water requirements of the state.

The legislature further
finds and declares that reclaimed water facilities are water pollution control
facilities as defined in chapter 70.146 RCW and are eligible for financial
assistance as provided in chapter 70.146 RCW. The legislature finds that
funding demonstration projects will ensure the future use of reclaimed water.
The demonstration projects in RCW 90.46.110 are varied in nature and will
provide the experience necessary to test different facets of the standards and
refine a variety of technologies so that water purveyors can begin to use
reclaimed water technology in a more cost-effective manner. This is especially
critical in smaller cities and communities where the feasibility for such
projects is great, but there are scarce resources to develop the necessary
facilities.

The legislature
further finds that the agricultural processing industry can play a critical and
beneficial role in promoting the efficient use of water by having the
opportunity to develop and reuse agricultural industrial reclaimed water from
food processing.

Sec. 2. RCW 90.46.010 and 1997 c
444 s 5 are each amended to read as follows:

((Unless the context
clearly requires otherwise,)) The definitions in this section apply
throughout this chapter unless the context clearly requires otherwise.

(1)
"Greywater" means wastewater having the consistency and strength of
residential domestic type wastewater. Greywater includes wastewater from
sinks, showers, and laundry fixtures, but does not include toilet or urinal
waters.

(2) "Land
application" means application of treated effluent for purposes of
irrigation or landscape enhancement for residential, business, and governmental
purposes.

(3) "Person"
means any state, individual, public or private corporation, political
subdivision, governmental subdivision, governmental agency, municipality,
copartnership, association, firm, trust estate, or any other legal entity
whatever.

(4) "Reclaimed
water" means effluent derived in any part from sewage from a wastewater
treatment system that has been adequately and reliably treated, so that as a
result of that treatment, it is suitable for a beneficial use or a controlled
use that would not otherwise occur and is no longer considered wastewater.

(5) "Sewage"
means water-carried human wastes from residences, buildings, industrial and
commercial establishments, or other places, together with such ground water
infiltration, surface waters, or industrial wastewater as may be present.

(6) "User"
means any person who uses reclaimed water.

(7)
"Wastewater" means water and wastes discharged from homes,
businesses, and industry to the sewer system.

(8) "Beneficial
use" means the use of reclaimed water, that has been transported from the
point of production to the point of use without an intervening discharge to the
waters of the state, for a beneficial purpose.

(9) "Direct
recharge" means the controlled subsurface addition of water directly to
the ground water basin that results in the replenishment of ground water.

(10) "Ground water
recharge criteria" means the contaminant criteria found in the drinking
water quality standards adopted by the state board of health pursuant to
chapter 43.20 RCW and the department of health pursuant to chapter 70.119A RCW.

(11) "Planned
ground water recharge project" means any reclaimed water project designed
for the purpose of recharging ground water, via direct recharge or surface
percolation.

(12) "Reclamation
criteria" means the criteria set forth in the water reclamation and reuse
interim standards and subsequent revisions adopted by the department of ecology
and the department of health.

(13) "Streamflow
augmentation" means the discharge of reclaimed water to rivers and streams
of the state or other surface water bodies, but not wetlands.

(14) "Surface
percolation" means the controlled application of water to the ground
surface for the purpose of replenishing ground water.

(15) "Wetland or
wetlands" means areas that are inundated or saturated by surface water or
ground water at a frequency and duration sufficient to support, and that under
normal circumstances do support, a prevalence of vegetation typically adapted
to life in saturated soil conditions. Wetlands generally include swamps,
marshes, bogs, and similar areas. Wetlands regulated under this chapter shall
be delineated in accordance with the manual adopted by the department of
ecology pursuant to RCW 90.58.380.

(16) "Constructed
beneficial use wetlands" means those wetlands intentionally constructed on
nonwetland sites to produce or replace natural wetland functions and values.
Constructed beneficial use wetlands are considered "waters of the
state."

(17) "Constructed
treatment wetlands" means those wetlands intentionally constructed on
nonwetland sites and managed for the primary purpose of wastewater or storm
water treatment. Constructed treatment wetlands are considered part of the
collection and treatment system and are not considered "waters of the
state."

(18)
"Agricultural industrial reclaimed water" means water that has been
used for the purpose of agriculture processing and has been adequately and
reliably treated, so that as a result of that treatment, it is suitable for
other agricultural water use.

(19)
"Agricultural processing" means the processing of crops or milk to
produce a product primarily for wholesale or retail sale for human or animal
consumption, including but not limited to potato, fruit, vegetable, and grain
processing.

(20)
"Agricultural water use" means the use of water for irrigation and
other uses related to the production of agricultural products. These uses
include, but are not limited to, construction, operation, and maintenance of
agricultural facilities and livestock operations at farms, ranches, dairies,
and nurseries. Examples of these uses include, but are not limited to, dust
control, temperature control, and fire control.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
3. A new section is added
to chapter 90.46 RCW to read as follows:

The owner of an
agricultural processing plant that generates agricultural industrial reclaimed
water shall obtain a permit from the department of ecology for application of
that water to agricultural water use. The department of ecology may issue an
agricultural reclaimed water permit under chapter 90.48 RCW to the owner of
the agricultural processing plant who may then distribute the water through
methods including, but not limited to, irrigation systems, subject to
provisions in the permit governing the location, rate, water quality, and
purpose. In cases where the department of ecology determines that a
significant risk to public health exists, in land application of the water, the
department must refer the application to the department of health for review
and consultation.

The owner of the
agricultural processing plant who obtains a permit under this section has the
exclusive right to the use of any agricultural industrial reclaimed water
generated from the plant and to the distribution of such water through
facilities including irrigation systems. Use and distribution of the water by
the owner is exempt from the permit requirements of RCW 90.03.250, 90.03.380,
90.44.060, and 90.44.100.

Nothing in this section
shall be construed to affect any right to use agricultural industrial process
water in existence on or before the effective date of this act. Further, the
use of agricultural industrial reclaimed water authorized under this section
shall not impair existing water right diversions from a surface water source
that is the same surface water supply for the agricultural processing plant and
the water rights are downstream from the agricultural processing plant's
surface water discharge points existing on the effective date of this act.

Sec. 4. RCW 90.14.140 and 1998 c
258 s 1 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) For the purposes of
RCW 90.14.130 through 90.14.180, "sufficient cause" shall be defined
as the nonuse of all or a portion of the water by the owner of a water right
for a period of five or more consecutive years where such nonuse occurs as a
result of:

(a) Drought, or other
unavailability of water;

(b) Active service in
the armed forces of the United States during military crisis;

(c) Nonvoluntary
service in the armed forces of the United States;

(d) The operation of
legal proceedings;

(e) Federal or state
agency leases of or options to purchase lands or water rights which preclude or
reduce the use of the right by the owner of the water right;

(f) Federal laws
imposing land or water use restrictions either directly or through the
voluntary enrollment of a landowner in a federal program implementing those
laws, or acreage limitations, or production quotas.

(2) Notwithstanding any
other provisions of RCW 90.14.130 through 90.14.180, there shall be no
relinquishment of any water right:

(a) If such right is
claimed for power development purposes under chapter 90.16 RCW and annual
license fees are paid in accordance with chapter 90.16 RCW;

(b) If such right is
used for a standby or reserve water supply to be used in time of drought or
other low flow period so long as withdrawal or diversion facilities are
maintained in good operating condition for the use of such reserve or standby
water supply;

(c) If such right is
claimed for a determined future development to take place either within fifteen
years of July 1, 1967, or the most recent beneficial use of the water right,
whichever date is later;

(d) If such right is
claimed for municipal water supply purposes under chapter 90.03 RCW;

(e) If such waters are
not subject to appropriation under the applicable provisions of RCW 90.40.030;
((or))

(f) If such right or
portion of the right is leased to another person for use on land other than the
land to which the right is appurtenant as long as the lessee makes beneficial
use of the right in accordance with this chapter and a transfer or change of
the right has been approved by the department in accordance with RCW 90.03.380,
90.03.383, 90.03.390, or 90.44.100; or

(g) If
such a right or portion of the right is authorized for a purpose that is
satisfied by the use of agricultural industrial reclaimed water as authorized
under section 3 of this act.

Sec. 5. RCW 90.03.252 and 1997 c
444 s 2 are each amended to read as follows:

The permit
requirements of RCW 90.03.250 do not apply to the use of reclaimed water by the
owner of a wastewater treatment facility under the provisions of RCW 90.46.120 and
do not apply to the use of agricultural industrial reclaimed water as provided
under section 3 of this act.

Sec. 6. RCW 90.44.062 and 1997 c
444 s 3 are each amended to read as follows:

The permit
requirements of RCW 90.44.060 do not apply to the use of reclaimed water by the
owner of a wastewater treatment facility under the provisions of RCW 90.46.120 and
do not apply to the use of agricultural industrial reclaimed water as provided
under section 3 of this act.

---
END ---