BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF
WASHINGTON:

_5 NEW SECTION. Sec. 1. A new section is
added to chapter 9.61 RCW

_6 to read as follows:

_7 Upon the arrest of a person at least thirteen years
of age and

_8 not more than twenty-one years of age for violating RCW
9.61.160

_9 relating to threats to bomb or injure property, on
public or

10 private elementary or secondary school premises, school
provided

11 transportation, or areas of facilities while being used

12 exclusively by public or private schools, the person
shall be

13 detained or confined in a juvenile or adult facility for
up to

14 seventy-two hours. The person shall not be released
within the

15 seventy-two hours until after the person has been
examined and

16 evaluated by the county-designated mental health
professional

17 unless the court in its discretion releases the person
sooner

p. 1 HB
1939

_1 after a determination regarding probable cause or on
probation

_2 bond or bail.

_3 Within twenty-four hours of the arrest, the
arresting law

_4 enforcement agency shall refer the person to the
county-designated

_5 mental health professional for examination and
evaluation under

_6 chapter 71.05 or 71.34 RCW and inform a parent or
guardian of the

_7 person of the arrest, detention, and examination. Notification
to

_8 the parent or guardian shall occur prior to any
examination or

_9 evaluation by the county-designated mental health
professional. The

10 county-designated mental health professional shall
examine and

11 evaluate the person subject to the provisions of chapter
71.05 or

12 71.34 RCW within twenty-four hours of receiving the
referral. The

13 examination shall occur at the facility in which the
person is

14 detained or confined. If the person has been released
on probation,

15 bond, or bail, the examination shall occur wherever is

16 appropriate.

17 The county-designated mental health professional
may, when

18 appropriate, determine whether to refer the person to
the county-

19 designated chemical dependency specialist for
examination and

20 evaluation in accordance with chapter 70.96A RCW. When
a referral

21 is made by the county-designated mental health
professional, the

22 county-designated chemical dependency specialist shall
examine the

23 person subject to the provisions of chapter 70.96A RCW
within

24 twenty-four hours of receiving the referral. The
examination shall

25 occur at the facility in which the person is detained or

26 confined. If the person has been released on probation,
bond, or

27 bail, the examination shall occur wherever is
appropriate.

28 Upon completion of any examination by the
county-designated

29 mental health professional or the county-designated
chemical

30 dependency specialist, the results of the examination
shall be

31 sent to the court with jurisdiction, the school, the
parents, and

32 to the person if eighteen years of age or older, and the
court

33 shall consider those results in making any determination
about the

34 person. However, any reference in the evaluation report
or reports

35 to facts or circumstances of the alleged acts which
resulted in

36 the arrest of the person shall not be admissible in any
criminal

37 or juvenile proceeding if the person was unrepresented
by counsel

HB 1939 p. 2

_1 at the time of the examination, or had not been
arraigned prior to

_2 the examination.

_3 The county-designated mental health professional and
county-

_4 designated chemical dependency specialist shall notify a
parent or

_5 guardian of the person, if the person is under the age
of

_6 eighteen, that an examination and evaluation has taken
place and

_7 the results of the examination. Nothing in this section
prohibits

_8 the delivery of additional, appropriate mental health
examinations

_9 to the person while the person is detained or confined.

10 If the county-designated mental health professional
determines

11 it is appropriate, the county-designated mental health

12 professional may refer the person to the local regional
support

13 network for follow-up services or the department of
social and

14 health services or other community providers for other
services to

15 the family and individual.

16 NEW SECTION. Sec. 2. A new section is
added to chapter 9A.48

17 RCW to read as follows:

18 Upon the arrest of a person at least thirteen years
of age and

19 not more than twenty-one years of age for violating RCW
9A.48.020

20 relating to arson in the first degree or RCW 9A.48.030
relating to

21 arson in the second degree, on public or private
elementary or

22 secondary school premises, school provided
transportation, or

23 areas of facilities while being used exclusively by
public or

24 private schools, the person shall be detained or
confined in a

25 juvenile or adult facility for up to seventy-two hours.
The person

26 shall not be released within the seventy-two hours until
after the

27 person has been examined and evaluated by the
county-designated

28 mental health professional unless the court in its
discretion

29 releases the person sooner after a determination
regarding

30 probable cause or on probation bond or bail.

31 Within twenty-four hours of the arrest, the
arresting law

32 enforcement agency shall refer the person to the
county-designated

33 mental health professional for examination and
evaluation under

34 chapter 71.05 or 71.34 RCW and inform a parent or
guardian of the

35 person of the arrest, detention, and examination.
Notification to

36 the parent or guardian shall occur prior to any
examination or

37 evaluation by the county-designated mental health
professional. The

p. 3 HB
1939

_1 county-designated mental health professional shall
examine and

_2 evaluate the person subject to the provisions of chapter
71.05 or

_3 71.34 RCW within twenty-four hours of receiving the
referral. The

_4 examination shall occur at the facility in which the
person is

_5 detained or confined. If the person has been released
on probation,

_6 bond, or bail, the examination shall occur wherever is

_7 appropriate.

_8 The county-designated mental health professional
may, when

_9 appropriate, determine whether to refer the person to
the county-

10 designated chemical dependency specialist for
examination and

11 evaluation in accordance with chapter 70.96A RCW. When
a referral

12 is made by the county-designated mental health
professional, the

13 county-designated chemical dependency specialist shall
examine the

14 person subject to the provisions of chapter 70.96A RCW
within

15 twenty-four hours of receiving the referral. The
examination shall

16 occur at the facility in which the person is detained or

17 confined. If the person has been released on probation,
bond, or

18 bail, the examination shall occur wherever is
appropriate.

19 Upon completion of any examination by the
county-designated

20 mental health professional or the county-designated
chemical

21 dependency specialist, the results of the examination
shall be

22 sent to the court with jurisdiction, the school, the
parents, and

23 to the person if eighteen years of age or older, and the
court

24 shall consider those results in making any determination
about the

25 person. However, any reference in the evaluation report
or reports

26 to facts or circumstances of the alleged acts which
resulted in

27 the arrest of the person shall not be admissible in any
criminal

28 or juvenile proceeding if the person was unrepresented
by counsel

29 at the time of the examination, or had not been arraigned
prior to

30 the examination.

31 The county-designated mental health professional and
county-

32 designated chemical dependency specialist shall notify a
parent or

33 guardian of the person, if the person is under the age
of

34 eighteen, that an examination and evaluation has taken
place and

35 the results of the examination. Nothing in this section
prohibits

36 the delivery of additional, appropriate mental health
examinations

37 to the person while the person is detained or confined.

38 If the county-designated mental health professional
determines

HB 1939 p. 4

_1 it is appropriate, the county-designated mental health

_2 professional may refer the person to the local regional
support

_3 network for follow-up services or the department of
social and

_4 health services or other community providers for other
services to

_5 the family and individual.

‑‑‑ END ‑‑‑

p. 5 HB
1939