BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF
WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec.
1. The legislature finds
that the purpose of Washington's accountability system is to improve student
learning and student achievement of the essential academic learning requirement
standards so that each individual student will be given the opportunity to
become a responsible citizen and successfully live, learn, and work in the
twenty-first century. The legislature has the ability and the responsibility
to acknowledge the difficult work educators and students have done by meeting
the standards set by the legislature. The legislature intends to reward the
staff in schools that have met or exceeded their fourth grade reading goals
early.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
2. A new section is added
to chapter 28A.655 RCW to read as follows:

(1) The superintendent
of public instruction shall award a banner honoring each school that has met or
exceeded its fourth grade reading goals, as defined in RCW 28A.655.050, on the
2000 and 2001 Washington assessment of student learning, plus five dollars for
each fourth grade full-time equivalent student in the school. For schools with
less than twenty-five fourth grade full-time equivalent students, a minimum
recognition award of one hundred dollars is to be sent to the school.

(2) The staff in each
school shall also have the opportunity to choose their form of recognition and
shall determine who shares in the recognition. The recognition may include,
but is not limited to:

(a) A community-wide
celebration;

(b) A school-wide
event, such as a spaghetti feed or dessert night, including staff, parents, and
other community members chosen by the staff; or

(c) An off-campus event
such as a dinner or day trip for selected school staff.

(3) The superintendent
of public instruction shall administer the program and distribute recognition
banners and cash awards directly to individual schools.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 3. If specific funding for
the purposes of this act, referencing this act by bill or chapter number, is
not provided by June 30, 2001, in the omnibus appropriations act, this act is
null and void.

---
END ---