BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF
WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec.
1. The legislature finds
that facilitating the environmental permit process will increase citizen
satisfaction and compliance with state and local permit requirements. Lack of
coordination in the processing of permit applications causes costly delays and
frustration to the applicant. The public deserves a clear, predictable system
for land-use decisions. The legislature also finds that permit issuance can be
expedited by requiring state agencies and local jurisdictions to coordinate
their permit processes.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
2. A new section is added
to chapter 43.21A RCW to read as follows:

(1) It is the intent of
this section to provide an interagency forum for the discussion of significant
issues related to the permitting processes and use authorizations for projects
that are proposed on state-owned aquatic lands where there are multiple
permits, programs, and legal authorities involved.

(2) It is a goal of
this section to encourage all agencies and local governments involved in
issuing permits or granting use authorizations for a single project on
state-owned aquatic lands to communicate with each other on a timely basis and
early in the project review process in order to maximize coordination,
facilitate problem resolution, promote the effectiveness of permit decisions,
and enhance citizen understanding and involvement in the permit process. It is
also a goal of this section that all permitting or authorizing federal and
state agencies, local governments, and tribal governments be involved in
coordinating their respective roles related to permits or use authorizations
from the outset of any review process.

(3) For the purposes of
this section, "aquatic lands" means "aquatic lands" as
defined in RCW 79.90.010.

(4) The applicant may
submit a joint aquatic resource permit application to the department if a
project proposed for the use of state-owned aquatic lands requires:

(a) A hydraulic project
approval under chapter 77.55 RCW;

(b) A wastewater
discharge permit under chapter 90.48 RCW, or a federal clean water act section
401 certification; and

(c) A substantial
development permit under chapter 90.58 RCW.

(5) If requested by the
applicant, the department shall facilitate a project scoping meeting including
the project applicant, the department, the department of natural resources, the
department of fish and wildlife, and the local governments in whose
jurisdiction the project is proposed. Federal agencies and tribal governments
that either issue or may require a permit or that may require a use
authorization for the project shall each be invited to name a representative to
participate in the coordinated permit review process for proposed projects on
state-owned aquatic lands. All participating agencies are encouraged to remain
in communication for purposes of coordination throughout the permit review
processes until final permit decisions are made.

(6) The purpose of the
scoping meeting is to share perspectives and identify the issues and
information needs of concern to each participant with regard to the proposed
project, and jointly develop a strategy for coordinating permitting and
issuance of use authorization issues. This project scoping process shall be
concluded within sixty days of the date of receipt of the joint aquatic resource
permit application by the permit assistance center.

(a) During this review,
the participating agencies shall identify:

(i) The specific
information needs and issues of concern and their significance to each
participant with regard to the permitting processes involved;

(ii) Any statutory or
regulatory conflicts that might arise relating to differing legal authorities
and roles of the agencies issuing the permit or use authorization of the
project;

(iii) Any state or
local jurisdiction or private sector liability that might result from
permitting or issuing a use authorization for the project; and

(iv) Any natural
resources, including federal or state listed species, that might be adversely
affected by the permitting or authorizing decision.

(b) Following this
project scoping review, the outcome shall be documented in written form and
furnished to the applicant, and be available to the public.

(c) Upon completion of
this review, the permitting and authorizing agencies and governments shall proceed
according to their respective statutes. Nothing in this section may prevent
the parties from reconvening later in the course of the permitting or use
authorization process.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
3. A new section is added to
chapter 47.01 RCW to read as follows:

The legislature
recognizes that the department is working with state and federal agencies to
address transportation construction and maintenance program impacts so that
these programs meet the requirements of the federal clean water act and the
consultation requirements of the federal endangered species act. The
legislature supports the department's efforts in this regard and encourages the
department to work collaboratively with local governments and other interested
parties during these consultations, and to provide local governments and other
interested parties with opportunity to participate in this process to the
extent practicable.

The department shall
report by December 1st of each year to the legislature the status of any
programmatic consultation developed under this section.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
4. A new section is added
to chapter 43.21A RCW to read as follows:

The legislature
recognizes that the department is working with state and federal agencies to
coordinate the permitting requirements of the federal clean water act and the
consultation requirements of the federal endangered species act. The
legislature supports the department's efforts in this regard and encourages the
department to work collaboratively with local governments and other interested
parties during these consultations, and to provide local governments and other
interested parties with opportunity to participate in this process to the
extent practicable.

The department shall
report by December 1st of each year to the legislature the status of any
programmatic consultation developed under this section.

Sec. 5. RCW 58.17.095 and 1986 c
233 s 1 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) A county,
city, or town may adopt an ordinance providing for the administrative review of
a preliminary plat without a public hearing ((by adopting an ordinance
providing for such administrative review)). The ordinance may specify a
threshold number of lots in a subdivision above which a public hearing must be
held, and may specify other factors which necessitate the holding of a public
hearing. ((The administrative review process shall include))

(2) If the county,
city, or town has not adopted consolidated permitting procedures and time
frames as provided in chapter 36.70B RCW, it shall conduct administrative
review of preliminary plats consistent with the following minimum
conditions:

(((1))) (a)
The notice requirements of RCW 58.17.090 shall be followed, except that the
publication shall be made within ten days of the filing of the application.
Additionally, at least ten days after the filing of the application notice both
shall be: (((a))) (i) Posted on or around the land proposed to
be subdivided in at least five conspicuous places designed to attract public
awareness of the proposal; and (((b))) (ii) mailed to the owner
of each lot or parcel of property located within at least three hundred feet of
the site. The applicant shall provide the county, city, or town with a list of
such property owners and their addresses. The notice shall include
notification that no public hearing will be held on the application, except as
provided by this section. The notice shall set out the procedures and time
limitations for persons to require a public hearing and make comments.

(((2))) (b)
Any person shall have a period of twenty days from the date of the notice to
comment upon the proposed preliminary plat. All comments received shall be
provided to the applicant. The applicant has seven days from receipt of the
comments to respond thereto.

(((3))) (c)
A public hearing on the proposed subdivision shall be held if any person files
a request for a hearing with the county, city, or town within twenty-one days
of the publishing of such notice. If such a hearing is requested, notice
requirements for the public hearing shall be in conformance with RCW 58.17.090,
and the ninety-day period for approval or disapproval of the proposed
subdivision provided for in RCW 58.17.140 shall commence with the date of the
filing of the request for a public hearing. Any hearing ordered under this
subsection shall be conducted by the planning commission or hearings officer as
required by county or city ordinance.

(((4))) (d)
On its own initiative within twenty-one days of the filing of the request for
approval of the subdivision, the governing body, or a designated employee or
official, of the county, city, or town, shall be authorized to cause a public
hearing to be held on the proposed subdivision within ninety days of the filing
of the request for the subdivision.

(((5))) (e)
If the public hearing is waived as provided in this section, the planning
commission or planning agency shall complete the review of the proposed preliminary
plat and transmit its recommendation to the legislative body as provided in RCW
58.17.100.

(3) If the county,
city, or town has adopted consolidated permitting procedures and time frames as
provided in chapter 36.70B RCW, it may conduct administrative review of
preliminary plats consistent with its procedures and time frames. At a
minimum, local permitting procedures and time frames related to administrative
review of preliminary plats shall provide for:

(a) Notice of
application by publication, posting, and mailing. All forms of notice shall
include a prominent statement that no public hearing will be held on the
application, except as provided by this section. All forms of notice shall
clearly state procedures and time frames for persons to make comments on the
proposal and request a public hearing;

(b) Written comments
on the application by any person. Comments received shall be provided to the
applicant, and the applicant shall have seven days from receipt of the comments
to respond thereto;

(c) A public hearing
on the application if any person files a request for a hearing within the time
frame specified. If a hearing is requested, notice requirements for the public
hearing and the time frame for approval or disapproval of the application shall
be consistent with other local permitting procedures. Any hearing conducted
under this subsection shall be conducted by the planning commission or hearing
officer as required by local ordinance;

(d) A public hearing
on the application if the legislative or executive branch of the county, city,
or town so requests within the time frame specified;

(e) Expedited agency
review and transmittal of its recommendation on the application to the
legislative body of the county, city, or town, if there is no request for
public hearing.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
6. A new section is added
to chapter 77.55 RCW to read as follows:

The legislature recognizes
that the department is working with state and federal agencies to coordinate
the permitting requirements of the federal clean water act and the consultation
requirements of the federal endangered species act. The legislature supports
the department's efforts in this regard and encourages the department to work
collaboratively with local governments and other interested parties during
these consultations, and to provide local governments and other interested
parties with opportunity to participate in this process to the extent
practicable.

The department shall
report by December 1st of each year to the legislature the status of any
programmatic consultation developed under this section.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
7. A new section is added
to chapter 36.70B RCW to read as follows:

(1) Except as otherwise
provided in subsection (2) of this section, a local government planning under
RCW 36.70A.040 shall issue its notice of final decision on a project permit
application within one hundred twenty days after the local government notifies
the applicant that the application is complete, as provided in RCW 36.70B.070.
In determining the number of days that have elapsed after the local government
has notified the applicant that the application is complete, the following
periods shall be excluded:

(a)(i) Any period
during which the applicant has been requested by the local government to
correct plans, perform required studies, or provide additional required
information. The period shall be calculated from the date the local government
notifies the applicant of the need for additional information until the earlier
of the date the local government determines whether the additional information
satisfies the request for information or fourteen days after the date the
information has been provided to the local government.

(ii) If the local
government determines that the information submitted by the applicant under
(a)(i) of this subsection is insufficient, it shall notify the applicant of the
deficiencies and the procedures under (a)(i) of this subsection shall apply as
if a new request for studies had been made;

(b) Any period during
which an environmental impact statement is being prepared following a
determination of significance pursuant to chapter 43.21C RCW, if the local
government by ordinance or resolution has established time periods for
completion of environmental impact statements, or if the local government and
the applicant in writing agree to a time period for completion of an
environmental impact statement;

(c) Any period for
administrative appeals of project permits, if an open record appeal hearing or
a closed record appeal, or both, are allowed. The local government by
ordinance or resolution shall establish a time period to consider and decide
such appeals. The time period shall not exceed: (i) Ninety days for an open
record appeal hearing; and (ii) sixty days for a closed record appeal. The
parties to an appeal may agree to extend these time periods; and

(d) Any extension of
time mutually agreed upon by the applicant and the local government.

(2) The time limits
established by subsection (1) of this section do not apply if a project permit
application:

(a) Requires an
amendment to the comprehensive plan or a development regulation;

(b) Requires approval
of a new fully contained community as provided in RCW 36.70A.350, a master
planned resort as provided in RCW 36.70A.360, or the siting of an essential
public facility as provided in RCW 36.70A.200; or

(c) Is substantially
revised by the applicant, in which case the time period shall start from the
date at which the revised project application is determined to be complete
under RCW 36.70B.070.

(3) If the local
government is unable to issue its final decision within the time limits
provided for in this section, it shall provide written notice of this fact to
the project applicant. The notice shall include a statement of reasons why the
time limits have not been met and an estimated date for issuance of the notice
of final decision.

(4) This section shall
apply to project permit applications filed on or after September 1, 2001.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
8. A new section is added
to chapter 64.40 RCW to read as follows:

A local government is
not liable for damages under this chapter due to the local government's failure
to make a final decision within the time limits established in section 7 of
this act.

Sec. 9. RCW 36.70B.060 and 1995
c 347 s 407 are each amended to read as follows:

Not later than March
31, 1996, each local government planning under RCW 36.70A.040 shall establish
by ordinance or resolution an integrated and consolidated project permit
process that may be included in its development regulations. In addition to
the elements required by RCW 36.70B.050, the process shall include the
following elements:

(1) A determination of
completeness to the applicant as required by RCW 36.70B.070;

(2) A notice of
application to the public and agencies with jurisdiction as required by RCW
36.70B.110;

(3) Except as provided
in RCW 36.70B.140, an optional consolidated project permit review process as
provided in RCW 36.70B.120. The review process shall provide for no more than
one consolidated open record hearing and one closed record appeal. If an open
record predecision hearing is provided prior to the decision on a project
permit, the process shall not allow a subsequent open record appeal hearing;

(4) Provision allowing
for any public meeting or required open record hearing to be combined with any
public meeting or open record hearing that may be held on the project by
another local, state, regional, federal, or other agency, in accordance with provisions
of section 7 of this act and RCW ((36.70B.090 and)) 36.70B.110;

(5) A single report
stating all the decisions made as of the date of the report on all project
permits included in the consolidated permit process that do not require an open
record predecision hearing and any recommendations on project permits that do
not require an open record predecision hearing. The report shall state any
mitigation required or proposed under the development regulations or the
agency's authority under RCW 43.21C.060. The report may be the local permit.
If a threshold determination other than a determination of significance has not
been issued previously by the local government, the report shall include or
append this determination;

(6) Except for the
appeal of a determination of significance as provided in RCW 43.21C.075, if a
local government elects to provide an appeal of its threshold determinations or
project permit decisions, the local government shall provide for no more than
one consolidated open record hearing on such appeal. The local government need
not provide for any further appeal and may provide an appeal for some but not
all project permit decisions. If an appeal is provided after the open record
hearing, it shall be a closed record appeal before a single decision-making
body or officer;

(7) A notice of
decision as required by RCW 36.70B.130 and issued within the time period
provided in section 7 of this act and RCW 36.70B.080 ((and 36.70B.090));

(8) Completion of
project review by the local government, including environmental review and
public review and any appeals to the local government, within any applicable
time periods under ((RCW 36.70B.090)) section 7 of this act; and

(9) Any other
provisions not inconsistent with the requirements of this chapter or chapter
43.21C RCW.

Sec. 10. RCW 36.70B.140 and 1995
c 347 s 418 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) A local government
by ordinance or resolution may exclude the following project permits from the
provisions of RCW 36.70B.060 through ((36.70B.090)) 36.70B.080,
section 7 of this act, and 36.70B.110 through 36.70B.130: Landmark
designations, street vacations, or other approvals relating to the use of
public areas or facilities, or other project permits, whether administrative or
quasi-judicial, that the local government by ordinance or resolution has
determined present special circumstances that warrant a review process
different from that provided in RCW 36.70B.060 through ((36.70B.090)) 36.70B.080,
section 7 of this act, and 36.70B.110 through 36.70B.130.

(2) A local government
by ordinance or resolution also may exclude the following project permits from
the provisions of RCW 36.70B.060 and 36.70B.110 through 36.70B.130: Lot line
or boundary adjustments and building and other construction permits, or similar
administrative approvals, categorically exempt from environmental review under
chapter 43.21C RCW, or for which environmental review has been completed in
connection with other project permits.

Sec. 11. RCW 36.70B.150 and 1995
c 347 s 419 are each amended to read as follows:

A local government not
planning under RCW 36.70A.040 may incorporate some or all of the provisions of
RCW 36.70B.060 through ((36.70B.090)) 36.70B.080, section 7 of this
act, and 36.70B.110 through 36.70B.130 into its procedures for review of
project permits or other project actions.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
12. (1) A task force is
created to review issues related to local project review processes and
requirements and to provide the legislature with recommendations related to:

(a) Streamlining the
process of local project review to reduce the administrative and development
costs and time associated with development proposals;

(b) Improving
coordination between federal, state, and local permitting authorities related
to processing development project applications;

(c) Consolidating
statutes and merging standards governing local project review;

(d) Providing
flexibility and funding for local governments to conduct comprehensive
environmental review in advance of development proposals; and

(e) Achieving a more
effective and cost-efficient permit system while ensuring environmental
protection and compliance with federal and state environmental laws.

(2) The task force
shall consist of eight members as follows: Four legislative members, appointed
by the cospeakers of the house of representatives and the majority and minority
leaders of the senate, including one each from the two largest caucuses of the
house of representatives and the senate; one representative each from the
association of Washington cities and the Washington state association of
counties; and one representative each from the department of community, trade,
and economic development and the department of ecology.

(3) The task force may
appoint an advisory committee to assist with consideration of issues and to
provide comment on proposals for legislative recommendations. The advisory
committee should include representatives from a variety of interest groups,
including but not limited to agencies, planners, land use attorneys, tribes,
developers, realtors, and environmental organizations. The staff of senate
committee services and the office of program research of the house of
representatives shall provide support to the task force.

(4) The task force
shall submit a report of its recommendations to the governor and the
legislature by December 1, 2001.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 13. Sections 8 and 12 of this
act expire June 30, 2002.

---
END ---