BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF
WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1. RCW 36.60.010 and 1985 c
187 s 1 are each amended to read as follows:

Subject to RCW
36.60.020, the legislative authority of a county may establish one or more
county rail districts within the county for the purpose of providing and
funding improved rail freight or passenger service, or both. The
boundaries of county rail districts shall be drawn to include contiguous
property in an area from which agricultural or other goods could be shipped by
the rail service provided. The district shall not include property outside
this area which does not, or, in the judgment of the county legislative
authority, is not expected to produce goods which can be shipped by rail, or
property substantially devoted to fruit crops or producing goods that are
shipped in a direction away from the district. A county rail district is a
quasi municipal corporation, an independent taxing "authority" within
the meaning of Article VII, section 1 of the state Constitution, and a
"taxing district" within the meaning of Article VII, section 2 of the
state Constitution.

A county rail district
shall constitute a body corporate and shall possess all the usual powers of a
corporation for public purposes as well as all other powers that may now or
hereafter be specifically conferred by statute, including, but not limited to,
the authority to hire employees, staff, and services, to enter into contracts,
to accept and expend or use gifts, grants, and donations, and to sue and be
sued.

The county legislative
authority shall be the governing body of a county rail district. The county
treasurer shall act as the ex officio treasurer of the county rail district.
The electors of a district are all registered voters residing within the
district.

This
authority and that provided in RCW 36.60.030 may only be exercised outside the
boundaries of the county rail district if such extraterritorial rail services,
equipment, or facilities are found, by resolution of the county legislative
authority exercising such authority, to be reasonably necessary to link the
rail services, equipment, and facilities within the rail district to an
interstate railroad system; however, if such extraterritorial rail services,
equipment, or facilities are in or are to be located in one or more other
counties, the legislative authority of such other county must consent by
resolution to the proposed plan of the originating county which consent shall
not be unreasonably withheld.

--- END ---