BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF
WASHINGTON:

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 1. Felons and others not
legally qualified to purchase or possess a handgun should be prevented from
participating in the sale or transfer of such firearms at gun shows. Promoting
public safety by prohibiting the illegal sale and transfer of such firearms is
a matter of significant public interest. It is the intent of the legislature,
therefore, to ensure adequate processes and safeguards are established to
ensure public safety and deter illegal gun sales and transfers.

---
END ---