BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF
WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec.
1. It is the intent of the
legislature to ensure that long-term care facilities are safe.

(1) The long-term care
resident and employee immunization act is intended to:

(a) Prevent and reduce
the occurrence and severity of the influenza virus and pneumococcal disease by
increasing the use of immunizations licensed by the food and drug
administration;

(b) Avoid pain,
suffering, and deaths that may result from the influenza virus and pneumococcal
disease;

(c) Improve the
well-being and quality of life of residents and employees of long-term care
facilities; and

(d) Reduce avoidable
costs associated with treating the influenza virus and pneumococcal disease.

(2) The legislature
finds that:

(a) Recent studies show
that it is important to immunize older citizens against the influenza virus and
pneumococcal disease;

(b) The centers for
disease control and prevention recommend individuals over age sixty-five
receive immunizations against the influenza virus and pneumococcal disease;

(c) The influenza virus
and pneumococcal disease have been identified as leading causes of death for
citizens over age sixty-five;

(d) Immunizations
licensed by the food and drug administration are readily available and
effective in reducing and preventing the severity of the influenza virus and
pneumococcal disease in people over age sixty-five;

(e) All types of
long-term care facilities operating in the state are appropriate locations to
improve immunization rates among residents over age sixty-five; and

(f) Employees of
long-term care facilities should be immunized against influenza and
pneumococcal disease to prevent the spread of these diseases to the frail and
elderly residents of long-term care facilities.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
2. A new section is added
to chapter 74.39 RCW to read as follows:

(1) Long-term care
facilities shall:

(a) Provide access
on-site or make available elsewhere for all employees and residents to obtain
the influenza and pneumococcal immunizations on an annual basis;

(b) Require that each
resident, or the resident's legal representative, upon admission to the
facility, be informed verbally and in writing of the benefits of receiving the
influenza virus immunization and the pneumococcal pneumonia immunization;

(c) Inform all
employees, verbally and in writing, at the time of hire, of the benefits of
receiving the influenza virus and pneumococcal pneumonia immunization.

(2) As used in this
section, "long-term care facility" includes nursing homes licensed
under chapter 18.51 RCW, boarding homes licensed under chapter 18.20 RCW, and
adult family homes licensed under chapter 70.128 RCW.

(3) The department of
health shall adopt rules to implement this section.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 3. This act may be known and
cited as the long-term care resident and employee immunization act of 2001.

---
END ---