BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF
WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1. RCW 90.58.080 and 1995 c
347 s 305 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) Local
governments shall develop or amend((, within twenty-four months after the
adoption of guidelines as provided in RCW 90.58.060,)) a master program for
regulation of uses of the shorelines of the state consistent with the required
elements of the guidelines adopted by the department. Except as provided in
subsection (2) of this section, master programs shall be reviewed and amended
as necessary for compliance with the guidelines and submitted to the department
for approval within twenty-four months after the adoption of guidelines as
provided in RCW 90.58.060.

(2) Consistent with
the priority salmon recovery regions identified in the statewide strategy to
recover salmon and population growth data provided by the office of financial
management, the following master program development or amendment schedule
applies for guidelines adopted by the department before December 31, 2000:

(a) For King, Snohomish,
Pierce, Clark, and Kitsap counties and the cities and towns therein with
shorelines of the state, master programs shall be reviewed and amended as
necessary for compliance with the guidelines and submitted to the department
for approval within forty-eight months after the adoption of guidelines as
provided in RCW 90.58.060;

(b) For Thurston,
Whatcom, Benton, Yakima, Skagit, Cowlitz, Clallam, Chelan, Mason, Lewis,
Jefferson, and Okanogan counties and the cities and towns therein with
shorelines of the state, master programs shall be reviewed and amended as
necessary for compliance with the guidelines and submitted to the department
for approval within sixty months after the adoption of guidelines as provided
in RCW 90.58.060;

(c) For
all other counties, cities, and towns with shorelines of the state, master
programs shall be reviewed and amended as necessary for compliance with the
guidelines and submitted to the department for approval within seventy-two
months after the adoption of guideline amendments as provided in RCW 90.58.060.

--- END ---