BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF
WASHINGTON:

_5 Sec. 1. RCW
82.04.4451 and 1997 c 238 s 2 are each amended to read

_6 as follows:

_7 (1) In computing the tax imposed under this chapter,
a credit

_8 is allowed against the amount of tax otherwise due under
this

_9 chapter, as provided in this section. The maximum
credit for a

10 taxpayer for a reporting period is ((thirty-five))
fifty dollars

11 multiplied by the number of months in the reporting
period, as

12 determined under RCW 82.32.045.

13 (2) When the amount of tax otherwise due under this
chapter is

14 equal to or less than the maximum credit, a credit is
allowed

15 equal to the amount of tax otherwise due under this
chapter.

16 (3) When the amount of tax otherwise due under this
chapter

17 exceeds the maximum credit, a reduced credit is allowed
equal to

p. 1 HB
1948

_1 twice the maximum credit, minus the tax otherwise due
under this

_2 chapter, but not less than zero.

_3 (4) The department may prepare a tax credit table
consisting of

_4 tax ranges using increments of no more than five dollars
and a

_5 corresponding tax credit to be applied to those tax
ranges. The

_6 table shall be prepared in such a manner that no
taxpayer will owe

_7 a greater amount of tax by using the table than would be
owed by

_8 performing the calculation under subsections (1) through
(3) of

_9 this section. A table prepared by the department under
this

10 subsection shall be used by all taxpayers in taking the
credit

11 provided in this section.

12 NEW SECTION. Sec. 2. This act is necessary
for the immediate

13 preservation of the public peace, health, or safety, or
support of

14 the state government and its existing public
institutions, and

15 takes effect July 1, 2001.

‑‑‑ END ‑‑‑

HB 1948 p. 2