BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF
WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec.
1. A new section is added
to chapter 84.36 RCW to read as follows:

(1) Eligible regulated
real property is exempt from taxation from regular property tax levies by the
state, city or town, and county. Eligible regulated real property means real
property for which the land value has been reduced by twenty-five percent or
more after November 20, 2000, as a result of regulation under a shoreline
master program adopted under chapter 90.58 RCW. The exemption continues until
the cumulative tax savings due to the exemption equals or exceeds the reduction
in value.

(2) A claim for
exemption shall be made and filed on or before March 31st with the county
assessor. The claim for exemption must be filed within three years of the
adoption of the regulation. To establish the value reduction, the property
owner may petition the county assessor under RCW 84.40.039 or establish the
value reduction through an appraisal report prepared by a state-certified
general real estate appraiser licensed under chapter 18.140 RCW. The value
reduction shall be determined with reference to the value on January 1st of the
year in which the claim for exemption is filed.

(3) If the value
reduction is established by the assessor, the owner may petition the county
board of equalization for a change in the value reduction within thirty days of
being notified of the assessor's valuation. If the value reduction is
established by an appraisal report, the state, city or town, or county in which
the property is located may petition the county board of equalization for a
change in the value reduction established in the appraisal report within thirty
days of receiving the appraisal report. Upon review by the county board of
equalization, board of tax appeals, or any court, the value reduction
established by an appraisal report is presumed correct, however, this
presumption is not a defense against any correction indicated by clear, cogent,
and convincing evidence.

(4) The assessor shall
either approve or deny the exemption and notify the property owner in writing
by August 1st. The property owner may appeal the assessor's determination
under the provisions of RCW 84.48.010.

(5) The
levy for a taxing district in any year shall be reduced as necessary to prevent
exemptions under this section from resulting in a higher tax rate than would
have occurred in the absence of the exemptions under this section.

--- END ---