BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF
WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1. RCW 66.24.450 and 1999 c
281 s 5 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) No club shall be
entitled to a spirits, beer, and wine private club license:

(a) Unless such private
club has been in continuous operation for at least one year immediately prior
to the date of its application for such license;

(b) Unless the private
club premises be constructed and equipped, conducted, managed, and operated to
the satisfaction of the board and in accordance with this title and the
regulations made thereunder;

(c) Unless the board
shall have determined pursuant to any regulations made by it with respect to
private clubs, that such private club is a bona fide private club; it being the
intent of this section that license shall not be granted to a club which is, or
has been, primarily formed or activated to obtain a license to sell liquor, but
solely to a bona fide private club, where the sale of liquor is incidental to the
main purposes of the spirits, beer, and wine private club, as defined in RCW
66.04.010(7).

(2) The annual fee for
a spirits, beer, and wine private club license, whether inside or outside of an
incorporated city or town, is seven hundred twenty dollars per year.

(3) The board may issue
an endorsement to the spirits, beer, and wine private club license that allows
up to forty nonclub, member-sponsored events using club liquor. Visitors and
guests may attend these events only by invitation of the sponsoring member or
members. These events may not be open to the general public. The fee for the
endorsement shall be an annual fee of nine hundred dollars. Upon the board's
request, the holder of the endorsement must provide the board or the board's
designee with the following information at least seventy-two hours prior to the
event: The date, time, and location of the event; the name of the sponsor of
the event; and a brief description of the purpose of the event.

(4) The board may
issue an endorsement to the spirits, beer, and wine private club license that
allows the holder of a spirits, beer, and wine private club license to sell for
off-premises consumption: (a) Wine vinted and bottled in the state of
Washington and carrying a label exclusive to the license holder selling the
wine; and (b) sparkling wine from California bottled exclusively for the
license holder selling the sparkling wine. Spirits and beer may not be sold
for off-premises consumption under this section. The annual fee for the endorsement
under this chapter is one hundred twenty dollars.

Sec. 2. RCW 66.24.452 and 1997 c
321 s 31 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) There shall be a
beer and wine license to be issued to a private club for sale of beer and wine
for on-premises consumption.

(2) Beer and wine sold
by the licensee may be on tap or by open bottles or cans.

(3) The fee for the
private club beer and wine license is one hundred eighty dollars per year.

(4) The
board may issue an endorsement to the private club beer and wine license that
allows the holder of a private club beer and wine license to sell for
off-premises consumption: (a) Wine vinted and bottled in the state of
Washington and carrying a label exclusive to the license holder selling the
wine; and (b) sparkling wine from California bottled exclusively for the
license holder selling the sparkling wine. Spirits and beer may not be sold
for off-premises consumption under this section. The annual fee for the
endorsement under this chapter is one hundred twenty dollars.

Sec. 3. RCW 66.24.425 and 1998 c
126 s 7 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) The board may, in
its discretion, issue a spirits, beer, and wine restaurant license to a
business which qualifies as a "restaurant" as that term is defined in
RCW 66.24.410 in all respects except that the business does not serve the
general public but, through membership qualification, selectively restricts
admission to the business. For purposes of RCW 66.24.400 and 66.24.420, all
licenses issued under this section shall be considered spirits, beer, and wine
restaurant licenses and shall be subject to all requirements, fees, and
qualifications in this title, or in rules adopted by the board, as are
applicable to spirits, beer, and wine restaurant licenses generally except that
no service to the general public may be required.

(2) No license shall be
issued under this section to a business:

(a) Which shall not
have been in continuous operation for at least one year immediately prior to
the date of its application; or

(b) Which denies
membership or admission to any person because of race, creed, color, national origin,
sex, or the presence of any sensory, mental, or physical handicap.

(3) The board may
issue an endorsement to the spirits, beer, and wine restaurant license that
allows the holder of a spirits, beer, and wine restaurant license to sell for
off-premises consumption: (a) Wine vinted and bottled in the state of
Washington and carrying a label exclusive to the license holder selling the
wine; and (b) sparkling wine from California bottled exclusively for the
license holder selling the sparkling wine. Spirits and beer may not be sold
for off-premises consumption under this section. The annual fee for the
endorsement under this chapter is one hundred twenty dollars.

Sec. 4. RCW 66.24.400 and 1998 c
126 s 5 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) There shall
be a retailer's license, to be known and designated as a spirits, beer, and
wine restaurant license, to sell spirituous liquor by the individual glass,
beer, and wine, at retail, for consumption on the premises, including mixed
drinks and cocktails compounded or mixed on the premises only: PROVIDED, That
a hotel, or club licensed under chapter 70.62 RCW with overnight sleeping
accommodations, that is licensed under this section may sell liquor by the
bottle to registered guests of the hotel or club for consumption in guest
rooms, hospitality rooms, or at banquets in the hotel or club: PROVIDED
FURTHER, That a patron of a bona fide hotel, restaurant, or club licensed under
this section may remove from the premises recorked or recapped in its original
container any portion of wine which was purchased for consumption with a meal,
and registered guests who have purchased liquor from the hotel or club by the
bottle may remove from the premises any unused portion of such liquor in its
original container. Such license may be issued only to bona fide restaurants,
hotels and clubs, and to dining, club and buffet cars on passenger trains, and
to dining places on passenger boats and airplanes, and to dining places at
civic centers with facilities for sports, entertainment, and conventions, and
to such other establishments operated and maintained primarily for the benefit
of tourists, vacationers and travelers as the board shall determine are
qualified to have, and in the discretion of the board should have, a spirits,
beer, and wine restaurant license under the provisions and limitations of this
title.

(2) The
board may issue an endorsement to the spirits, beer, and wine restaurant
license that allows the holder of a spirits, beer, and wine restaurant license
to sell for off-premises consumption: (a) Wine vinted and bottled in the state
of Washington and carrying a label exclusive to the license holder selling the
wine; and (b) sparkling wine from California bottled exclusively for the
license holder selling the sparkling wine. Spirits and beer may not be sold
for off-premises consumption under this section. The annual fee for the
endorsement under this chapter is one hundred twenty dollars.

---
END ---