BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF
WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1. RCW 19.27.015 and 1996 c
157 s 1 are each amended to read as follows:

((As used in this
chapter:)) The definitions in this section apply throughout this chapter
unless the context clearly requires otherwise.

(1) "City"
means a city or town((;)).

(2) "Manufactured
home" means a single-family dwelling built in accordance with regulations
adopted under the national manufactured housing construction and safety
standards act of 1974 (42 U.S.C. 5401 et seq.) and installed in accordance with
standards adopted under RCW 43.22.440.

(3) "Mobile
home" means a factory-built dwelling built before June 15, 1976, to
standards other than the national manufactured housing construction and safety
standards act of 1974 (42 U.S.C. 5401 et seq.), and acceptable under applicable
state codes in effect at the time of construction or introduction of the home
into this state, and installed in accordance with standards adopted under RCW
43.22.440.

(4)
"Multifamily residential building" means common wall residential
buildings that consist of four or fewer units, that do not exceed two stories
in height, that are less than five thousand square feet in area, and that have
a one-hour fire-resistive occupancy separation between units((; and)).

(((3))) (5)
"Temporary growing structure" means a structure that has the sides
and roof covered with polyethylene, polyvinyl, or similar flexible synthetic
material and is used to provide plants with either frost protection or
increased heat retention.

Sec. 2. RCW 19.27.020 and 1985 c
360 s 6 are each amended to read as follows:

The purpose of this
chapter is to promote the health, safety and welfare of the occupants or users
of buildings ((and)), structures, and manufactured and mobile
homes, and the general public, by the provision of building codes
throughout the state. Accordingly, this chapter is designed to effectuate the
following purposes, objectives, and standards:

(1) To require minimum
performance standards and requirements for construction and construction
materials, consistent with accepted standards of engineering, fire and life
safety.

(2) To require
standards and requirements in terms of performance and nationally accepted
standards.

(3) To permit the use
of modern technical methods, devices and improvements.

(4) To eliminate
restrictive, obsolete, conflicting, duplicating and unnecessary regulations and
requirements which could unnecessarily increase construction costs or retard
the use of new materials and methods of installation or provide unwarranted
preferential treatment to types or classes of materials or products or methods
of construction.

(5) To provide for
standards and specifications for making buildings and facilities accessible to
and usable by physically disabled persons.

(6) To consolidate
within each authorized enforcement jurisdiction, the administration and
enforcement of building codes.

Sec. 3. RCW 19.27.031 and 1995 c
343 s 1 are each amended to read as follows:

Except as otherwise
provided in this chapter, there shall be in effect in all counties and cities
the state building code which shall consist of the following codes which are
hereby adopted by reference:

(1) Uniform Building
Code and Uniform Building Code Standards, published by the International
Conference of Building Officials;

(2) Uniform Mechanical
Code, including Chapter 13, Fuel Gas Piping, Appendix B, published by the
International Conference of Building Officials;

(3) The Uniform Fire
Code and Uniform Fire Code Standards, published by the International Fire Code
Institute: PROVIDED, That, notwithstanding any wording in this code,
participants in religious ceremonies shall not be precluded from carrying
hand-held candles;

(4) Except as provided
in RCW 19.27.170, the Uniform Plumbing Code and Uniform Plumbing Code
Standards, published by the International Association of Plumbing and
Mechanical Officials: PROVIDED, That chapters 11 and 12 of such code are not
adopted; ((and))

(5) The rules and regulations
adopted by the council establishing standards for making buildings and
facilities accessible to and usable by the physically handicapped or elderly
persons as provided in RCW 70.92.100 through 70.92.160; and

(6) With respect to
alterations of manufactured homes, regulations adopted under the national
manufactured housing construction and safety standards act of 1974 (42 U.S.C.
5401 et seq.), as applicable.

In case of conflict
among the codes enumerated in subsections (1), (2), (3), ((and)) (4),
and (6) of this section, the first named code shall govern over those
following.

The codes enumerated in
this section shall be adopted by the council as provided in RCW 19.27.074.

The council may issue
opinions relating to the codes at the request of a local official charged with
the duty to enforce the enumerated codes.

Sec. 4. RCW 19.27.060 and 1989 c
266 s 2 and 1989 c 246 s 1 are each reenacted and amended to read as follows:

(1) The governing
bodies of counties and cities may amend the codes enumerated in RCW 19.27.031
as amended and adopted by the state building code council as they apply within
their respective jurisdictions, but the amendments shall not result in a code
that is less than the minimum performance standards and objectives contained in
the state building code.

(a) No amendment to a
code enumerated in RCW 19.27.031 as amended and adopted by the state building
code council that affects single family or multifamily residential buildings
shall be effective unless the amendment is approved by the building code
council under RCW 19.27.074(1)(b).

(b) Any county or city
amendment to a code enumerated in RCW 19.27.031 which is approved under RCW
19.27.074(1)(b) shall continue to be effective after any action is taken under
RCW 19.27.074(1)(a) without necessity of reapproval under RCW 19.27.074(1)(b)
unless the amendment is declared null and void by the council at the time any
action is taken under RCW 19.27.074(1)(a) because such action in any way
altered the impact of the amendment.

(2) Except as permitted
or provided otherwise under this section, the state building code shall be
applicable to all buildings and structures, and to all alterations of
manufactured and mobile homes, including those buildings, structures,
and manufactured and mobile homes owned by the state or by any governmental
subdivision or unit of local government.

(3) The governing body
of each county or city may limit the application of any portion of the state
building code to exclude specified classes or types of buildings or structures
according to use other than single family or multifamily residential
buildings: PROVIDED, That in no event shall fruits or vegetables of the tree
or vine stored in buildings or warehouses constitute combustible stock for the
purposes of application of the uniform fire code.

(4) The provisions of
this chapter shall not apply to any building four or more stories high with a B
occupancy as defined by the uniform building code, 1982 edition, and with a
city fire insurance rating of 1, 2, or 3 as defined by a recognized fire rating
bureau or organization.

(5) No provision of the
uniform fire code concerning roadways shall be part of the state building
code: PROVIDED, That this subsection shall not limit the authority of a county
or city to adopt street, road, or access standards.

(6) The provisions of
the state building code may be preempted by any city or county to the extent
that the code provisions relating to the installation or use of sprinklers in
jail cells conflict with the secure and humane operation of jails.

(7)(a) Effective one
year after July 23, 1989, the governing bodies of counties and cities may adopt
an ordinance or resolution to exempt from permit requirements certain
construction or alteration of either group R, division 3, or group M, division
1 occupancies, or both, as defined in the uniform building code, 1988 edition,
for which the total cost of fair market value of the construction or alteration
does not exceed fifteen hundred dollars. The permit exemption shall not
otherwise exempt the construction or alteration from the substantive standards
of the codes enumerated in RCW 19.27.031, as amended and maintained by the
state building code council under RCW 19.27.070.

(b) Prior to July 23,
1989, the state building code council shall adopt by rule, guidelines exempting
from permit requirements certain construction and alteration activities under
(a) of this subsection.

(8) Before December
1, 2001, the state building code council shall, for purposes of alterations of
manufactured homes, adopt by rule regulations adopted under the national
manufactured housing construction and safety standards act of 1974 (42 U.S.C.
5401 et seq.), and requirements for maintaining the certification label or
other label that must be permanently affixed to a manufactured home under
federal law.

Sec. 5. RCW 43.22.335 and 1999 c
22 s 1 are each amended to read as follows:

Unless the context
clearly requires otherwise, the definitions in this section apply throughout
RCW 43.22.340 through 43.22.420.

(1) (("Park
trailer" means a park trailer as defined in the American National
Standards Institute A119.5 standard for park trailers.

(2)
"Recreational vehicle" means a vehicular-type unit primarily designed
for recreational camping or travel use that has its own motive power or is
mounted on or towed by another vehicle. The units include travel trailers,
fifth-wheel trailers, folding camping trailers, truck campers, and motor homes.

(3))) "Conversion vendor units" means a
motor vehicle or recreational vehicle that has been converted or built for the
purpose of being used for commercial sales at temporary locations. The units must
be less than eight feet six inches wide in the set-up position and the inside
working area must be less than forty feet in length.

(((4))) (2)
"Installed manufactured home" means a manufactured home installed in
accordance with the standards adopted under RCW 43.22.440.

(3)
"Manufactured home" means a single-family dwelling required to be
built in accordance with regulations adopted under the national manufactured
housing construction and safety standards act of 1974 (42 U.S.C. 5401 et seq.).

(4) "Medical
unit" means a self-propelled unit used to provide medical examinations,
treatments, and medical and dental services or procedures, not including
emergency response vehicles.

(5) "Mobile
home" means a factory-built dwelling built before June 15, 1976, to
standards other than the national manufactured housing construction and safety
standards act of 1974 (42 U.S.C. 5401 et seq.), and acceptable under applicable
state codes in effect at the time of construction or introduction of the home
into this state.

(6) "Park
trailer" means a park trailer as defined in the American national
standards institute A119.5 standard for park trailers.

(7)
"Recreational vehicle" means a vehicular-type unit primarily designed
for recreational camping or travel use that has its own motive power or is
mounted on or towed by another vehicle. The units include travel trailers,
fifth-wheel trailers, folding camping trailers, truck campers, and motor homes.

Sec. 6. RCW 43.22.340 and 1999 c
22 s 2 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) The director shall
adopt specific rules for conversion vending units and medical units. The rules
for conversion vending units and medical units shall be established to protect
the occupants from fire; to address other life safety issues; and to ensure
that the design and construction are capable of supporting any concentrated
load of five hundred pounds or more.

(2) The director of
labor and industries shall adopt rules governing safety of body and frame
design, and the installation of plumbing, heating, and electrical equipment in manufactured
and mobile homes, commercial coaches, recreational vehicles, and/or park
trailers subject to the following: ((PROVIDED, That))

(a) The director
shall not prescribe or enforce rules governing the body and frame design of
recreational vehicles and park trailers until after the American national
standards institute shall have published standards and
specifications upon this subject.

(b) The rules
shall be reasonably consistent with recognized and accepted principles of
safety for body and frame design and plumbing, heating, and electrical
installations, in order to protect the health and safety of the people of this
state from dangers inherent in the use of substandard and unsafe body and frame
design, construction, plumbing, heating, electrical, and other equipment and
shall correlate with and, so far as practicable, conform to the then current
standards and specifications of the American national standards institute
standards A119.1 for mobile homes and commercial coaches, A119.2 for
recreational vehicles, and A119.5 for park trailers.

(c) Beginning on the
effective date of rules adopted by the state building code council under RCW
19.27.060(8), alterations of installed manufactured or mobile homes are subject
to the codes adopted under chapters 19.27 and 19.28 RCW, to be enforced and
fees charged by a local building official or by the department of labor and
industries under chapter 19.28 RCW, as applicable.

(3)(a) Except as
provided in (b) of this subsection, it shall be unlawful for any person to
lease, sell or offer for sale, within this state, any manufactured or
mobile homes, commercial coaches, conversion vending units, medical units,
recreational vehicles, and/or park trailers manufactured after January 1, 1968,
containing plumbing, heating, electrical, or other equipment, and after July 1,
1970 body and frame design or construction unless such equipment meets the
requirements of the rules provided for in this section.

(b) With respect to
installed manufactured or mobile homes, this subsection applies only if an
alteration of the home is a serious noncompliance with the rules provided for
in this section and the use of the home constitutes a hazard to safety, health,
or public welfare.

Sec. 7. RCW 43.22.360 and 1999 c
22 s 4 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) Plans and
specifications of each model or production prototype of a manufactured or
mobile home, commercial coach, conversion vending units, medical units,
recreational vehicle, and/or park trailer showing body and frame design,
construction, plumbing, heating and electrical specifications and data shall be
submitted to the department of labor and industries for approval and
recommendations with respect to compliance with the rules and standards of each
of such agencies. When plans have been submitted and approved as required, no
((changes or)) alterations shall be made to body and frame design,
construction, plumbing, heating or electrical installations or specifications
shown thereon in any manufactured or mobile home, commercial coach,
conversion vending units, medical units, recreational vehicle, or park trailer
without prior written approval of the department of labor and industries.

(2) The director may
adopt rules that provide for approval of a plan that is certified as meeting
state requirements or the equivalent by a professional who is licensed or
certified in a state whose licensure or certification requirements meet or
exceed Washington requirements.

Sec. 8. RCW 43.22.390 and 1999 c
22 s 7 are each amended to read as follows:

Manufactured and mobile
homes, commercial coaches, conversion vending units, medical units,
recreational vehicles, and/or park trailers subject to the provisions of RCW
43.22.340 through 43.22.410, and uninstalled manufactured and mobile
homes, commercial coaches, conversion vending units, medical units,
recreational vehicles, and/or park trailers upon which alterations of body and
frame design, construction or installations of plumbing, heating or electrical
equipment referred to in RCW 43.22.360 are made after July 1, 1968, shall have
affixed thereto such insigne of approval.

Sec. 9. RCW 43.22.350 and 1999 c
22 s 3 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) In compliance with
any applicable provisions of this chapter, the director of the department of
labor and industries shall establish a schedule of fees, whether on the basis
of plan approval or inspection, for the issuance of an insigne which indicates
that the manufactured or mobile home, commercial coach, conversion
vending units, medical units, recreational vehicle, and/or park trailer
complies with the provisions of RCW 43.22.340 through 43.22.410 or for any
other purpose specifically authorized by any applicable provision of this
chapter.

(2) Insignia are not
required on manufactured or mobile homes, commercial coaches, conversion
vending units, medical units, recreational vehicles, and/or park trailers
manufactured within this state for sale outside this state which are sold to
persons outside this state.

Sec. 10. RCW 43.22.370 and 1999 c
22 s 5 are each amended to read as follows:

Any manufactured or
mobile home, commercial coach, conversion vending units, medical units,
recreational vehicle, and/or park trailer leased or sold in Washington and
manufactured prior to July 1, 1968, which has not been inspected prior to its
sale and which does not meet the requirements prescribed will not be required
to comply with those requirements except for alterations or installations
referred to in RCW 43.22.360.

Sec. 11. RCW 43.22.380 and 1999 c
22 s 6 are each amended to read as follows:

Used manufactured
and mobile homes, commercial coaches, conversion vending units, medical
units, recreational vehicles, and/or park trailers manufactured for use outside
this state which do not meet the requirements prescribed and have been used for
six months or more will not be required to comply with those requirements
except for alterations or installations referred to in RCW 43.22.360.

Sec. 12. RCW 43.22.400 and 1995 c
280 s 11 are each amended to read as follows:

If the director of the
department of labor and industries determines that the standards for body and
frame design, construction and the plumbing, heating and electrical equipment
installed in manufactured or mobile homes, commercial coaches,
recreational vehicles, and/or park trailers by the statutes or rules and
regulations of other states are at least equal to the standards prescribed by
this state, he or she may so provide by regulation. Any manufactured
or mobile home, commercial coach, recreational vehicle, and/or park trailer
which a state listed in such regulations has approved as meeting its standards
for body and frame design, construction and plumbing, heating and electrical
equipment shall be deemed to meet the standards of the director of the
department of labor and industries, if he or she determines that the
standards of such state are actually being enforced.

Sec. 13. RCW 43.22.410 and 1999 c
22 s 8 are each amended to read as follows:

Any manufactured or
mobile home, commercial coach, conversion vending units, medical units,
recreational vehicle, and/or park trailer that meets the requirements
prescribed under RCW 43.22.340 shall not be required to comply with any
ordinances of a city or county prescribing requirements for body and frame
design, construction or plumbing, heating and electrical equipment installed in
manufactured or mobile homes, commercial coaches, conversion vending
units, medical units, recreational vehicles, and/or park trailers.

Sec. 14. RCW 43.22.420 and 1999 c
22 s 9 are each amended to read as follows:

There is hereby created
a factory assembled structures advisory board consisting of nine members to be
appointed by the director of labor and industries. It shall be the purpose and
function of the board to advise the director on all matters pertaining to the
enforcement of this chapter including but not limited to standards of body and
frame design, construction and plumbing, heating and electrical installations,
minimum inspection procedures, the adoption of rules pertaining to the
manufacture of factory assembled structures, ((mobile)) manufactured
homes, commercial coaches, conversion vending units, medical units,
recreational vehicles, and park trailers. The advisory board shall
periodically review the rules adopted under RCW 43.22.450 through 43.22.490 and
shall recommend changes of such rules to the department if it deems changes
advisable.

The members of the
advisory board shall be representative of consumers, the regulated industries,
and allied professionals. The term of each member shall be four years.
However, the director may appoint the initial members of the advisory board to
staggered terms not exceeding four years.

The chief inspector or
any person acting as chief inspector for the factory assembled structures, manufactured
or mobile home, commercial coach, conversion vending units, medical units,
recreational vehicle, and park trailer section shall serve as secretary of the
board during his tenure as chief. Meetings of the board shall be called at the
discretion of the director of labor and industries, but at least quarterly.
Each member of the board shall be paid travel expenses in accordance with RCW
43.03.050 and 43.03.060 which shall be paid out of the appropriation to the
department of labor and industries, upon vouchers approved by the director of
labor and industries or his or her designee.

Sec. 15. RCW 43.22.431 and 1977
ex.s. c 21 s 1 are each amended to read as follows:

The director of the
department of labor and industries may enforce ((mobile)) manufactured
home safety and construction standards adopted by the secretary of housing and
urban development under the national ((Mobile)) manufactured home
construction and safety standards act of 1974 (800
Stat. 700; 42 U.S.C. Secs. 5401-5426). Furthermore, the director may make
agreements with the United States government and private inspection
organizations to implement the development and enforcement of applicable
provisions of this chapter and the national ((Mobile)) manufactured
home construction and safety standards act of
1974 (800 Stat. 700; 42 U.S.C. Secs. 5401-5426).

Sec. 16. RCW 43.22.432 and 1977
ex.s. c 21 s 2 are each amended to read as follows:

The
department may adopt all standards and regulations adopted by the secretary
under the national ((Mobile)) manufactured home construction
and safety standards act of 1974 (800 Stat. 700; 42 U.S.C.
Secs. 5401-5426) for ((mobile)) manufactured home construction
and safety standards. If any deletions or amendments to the federal standards
or regulations are thereafter made and notice thereof is given to the
department, the standards or regulations shall be considered automatically
adopted by the state under this chapter after the expiration of thirty days
from publication in the federal register of a final order describing the
deletions or amendments unless within that thirty day period the department
objects to the deletion or amendment. In case of objection, the department
shall proceed under the rule making procedure of chapter 34.05 RCW.

Sec. 17. RCW 43.22.434 and 1999 c
22 s 10 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) The director or the
director's authorized representative may conduct such inspections,
investigations, and audits as may be necessary to adopt or enforce manufactured
and mobile home, commercial coach, conversion vending units, medical units,
recreational vehicle, park trailer, factory built housing, and factory built
commercial structure rules adopted under the authority of this chapter or to
carry out the director's duties under this chapter.

(2) For purposes of
enforcement of this chapter, persons duly designated by the director upon
presenting appropriate credentials to the owner, operator, or agent in charge
may:

(a) At reasonable times
and without advance notice enter any factory, warehouse, or establishment in
which manufactured and mobile homes, commercial coaches, conversion
vending units, medical units, recreational vehicles, park trailers, factory
built housing, and factory built commercial structures are manufactured,
stored, or held for sale;

(b) At reasonable
times, within reasonable limits, and in a reasonable manner inspect any
factory, warehouse, or establishment as required to comply with the standards
adopted by the secretary of housing and urban development under the national
((Mobile)) manufactured home construction and safety
standards act of 1974. Each inspection shall be commenced and
completed with reasonable promptness; and

(c) As requested by an
owner of a conversion vending unit or medical unit, inspect an alteration.

(3) The
department shall set a schedule of fees by rule which will cover the costs
incurred by the department in the administration of RCW 43.22.335 through
43.22.490.

Sec. 18. RCW 43.22.440 and 1988 c
239 s 5 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) The legislature
finds that inspections of manufactured and mobile home installation are
not done on a consistent basis. Manufactured and mobile homes provide
housing for many people in the state, and improperly installed manufactured
or mobile homes are a serious health and safety risk. Where possible and
practical, manufactured and mobile homes should be treated the same as
any housing inhabited or to be inhabited by persons in this state, including
housing built according to the state building code.

(2) In consultation
with the factory assembled structures advisory board for ((mobile)) manufactured
homes, the director of labor and industries shall by rule establish uniform
standards for the performance and workmanship of installation service and
warranty service by persons or entities engaged in performing the services
within this state for all manufactured and mobile homes, as defined in
RCW 46.04.302. The standards shall conform, where applicable, with statutes,
rules, and recommendations established under the ((federal)) national ((mobile))
manufactured home construction and safety standards act of 1974 (42
U.S.C. Sec. 5401 et seq.). These rules regarding the installation of manufactured
and mobile homes shall be enforced and fees charged by the counties and
cities in the same manner the state building code is enforced under RCW
19.27.050.

(3) In addition to and
in conjunction with the remedies provided in this chapter, failure to remedy
any breach of the standards and rules so established, upon adequate notice and
within a reasonable time, is a violation of the consumer protection act, chapter
19.86 RCW and subject to the remedies provided in that chapter.

Sec. 19. RCW 43.22.442 and 1980 c
153 s 2 are each amended to read as follows:

A manufacturer of ((mobile))
manufactured homes who designates a representative within this state to
provide consumers with warranty service for ((mobile)) manufactured
homes on behalf of the manufacturer shall make reasonable and timely
compensation to the representative for performance of the warranty service.

Sec. 20. RCW 43.22.450 and 1973
1st ex.s. c 22 s 1 are each amended to read as follows:

Whenever used in RCW
43.22.450 through 43.22.490:

(1)
"Department" means the Washington state department of labor and
industries;

(2)
"Approved" means approved by the department;

(3) "Factory built
housing" means any structure designed primarily for human occupancy other
than a manufactured or mobile home the structure or any room of which is
either entirely or substantially prefabricated or assembled at a place other
than a building site;

(4) "Install"
means the assembly of factory built housing or factory built commercial
structures at a building site;

(5) "Building
site" means any tract, parcel or subdivision of land upon which factory
built housing or a factory built commercial structure is installed or is to be
installed;

(6) "Local
enforcement agency" means any agency of the governing body of any city or
county which enforces laws or ordinances governing the construction of
buildings;

(7) "Commercial
structure" means a structure designed or used for human habitation, or
human occupancy for industrial, educational, assembly, professional or
commercial purposes.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 21. This act applies to
installed manufactured and mobile homes without regard to the date of
installation.

---
END ---