BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF
WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec.
1. The definitions in this
section apply throughout this act unless the context clearly requires
otherwise.

(1) "Benefit
date" means the date that the recipient receives the business subsidy. If
the business subsidy involves the purchase, lease, or donation of physical
equipment, then the benefit date begins when the recipient puts the equipment
into service. If the business subsidy is for improvements to property, then
the benefit date refers to the earliest date of either:

(a) When the
improvements are finished for the entire project; or

(b) When a business
occupies the property. If a business occupies the property and the subsidy
grantor expects that other businesses will also occupy the same property, the
grantor may assign a separate benefit date for each business when it first
occupies the property.

(2) "Business
subsidy" or "subsidy" means a state or local government agency
grant, contribution of personal property, real property, infrastructure, the
principal amount of a loan at rates below those commercially available to the
recipient, any reduction or deferral of any tax or any fee, and guarantee of
any payment under any loan, lease, or other obligation, or any preferential use
of government facilities given to a business.

The following forms of
financial assistance are not business subsidies:

(a) A grant of less
than twenty-five thousand dollars; and

(b) Tax reductions
resulting from conformity with federal tax law.

(3) "Grantor"
means any state or local government agency with the authority to grant a
business subsidy.

(4) "Local
government agency" includes a statutory or home rule charter city, housing
and redevelopment authority, town, county, port authority, economic development
authority, community development agency, nonprofit entity created by a local
government agency, or any other entity created by or authorized by a local
government with authority to provide business subsidies.

(5)
"Recipient" means any for-profit or nonprofit business entity that
receives a business subsidy. Only nonprofit entities with at least one hundred
full-time equivalent positions and a ratio of highest to lowest paid employees
that exceeds ten to one, determined on the basis of full-time equivalent
positions, are included in this definition.

(6) "State
government agency" means any state agency that has the authority to award
business subsidies.

(7) "Wage
bands" means the following five grouping of wage rates: (a) Up to
seventeen dollars per hour; (b) seventeen dollars and one cent to twenty-two
dollars per hour; (c) twenty-two dollars and one cent to twenty-seven dollars
per hour; (d) twenty-seven dollars and one cent to thirty-five dollars per hour;
and (e) thirty-five dollars and one cent per hour and above. These amounts
shall be indexed to the state average wage as determined annually by the
employment security department.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
2. (1) A recipient must
provide information to grantors. The information must be filed on forms
developed by the department of revenue in cooperation with representatives of
local government. Copies of the completed forms must be sent to the department
of revenue and the local government agency that provided the business subsidy.
The report must include:

(a) The type, public
purpose, and amount of all subsidies, and type of district if the subsidy is
tax increment financing.

(b) The hourly wage of
each job created with separate bands of wages;

(c) Whether the jobs
are full time or part time;

(d) The recipient's
standard industrial code;

(e) The sum of the
hourly wages and cost of health insurance provided by the employer with
separate bands of wages;

(f) The location of the
recipient prior to receiving the business subsidy;

(g) The name and
address of the parent corporation of the recipient, if any;

(h) A list of all
financial assistance by all grantors for the project including name of grantor,
amount of assistance, how long assistance was received, and what the assistance
was used for; and

(i) Other information
the department of revenue may request.

(2) A report under
subsection (1) of this section must be filed by August 1st of each year for the
previous fiscal year.

(3) If the recipient
does not submit its report, the local government agency must mail the recipient
a warning within one week of the required filing date. If, after fourteen days
of the postmarked date of the warning, the recipient fails to provide a report,
the recipient must pay to the grantor a penalty of five hundred dollars for
each subsequent day until the report is filed. The maximum penalty may not
exceed fifty thousand dollars. If the recipient does not submit its report by
November 1st, it shall be ineligible for subsidies until the report has been
satisfactorily completed and submitted.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
3. (1) Local government
agencies and state government agencies, regardless of whether or not they have
awarded any business subsidies, must file a report by September 1st of each
year with the department of revenue. The local government agency must include
a list of recipients that did not complete the report required under section 2
of this act, recipients that have not met their job and wage goals within two
years, and the steps being taken to bring them into compliance or to recoup the
subsidy.

(2) If the department
of revenue has not received the report under subsection (1) of this section by
September 1st from an entity required to report, the department of revenue
shall issue a warning to the government agency. If the department of revenue
has still not received the report by November 1st of that same year from an
entity required to report, then that government agency may not award any
business subsidies until the report has been filed.

(3) The department of
revenue must provide information on reporting requirements to state and local
government agencies.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
4. (1) The department of
revenue must publish a compilation and summary of the results of the reports
for the previous calendar year by December 1st of each year. The reports of
the recipients and government agencies to the department of revenue and the
compilation and summary report of the department of revenue must be made
available to the public.

(2) The department of
revenue must coordinate the production of reports so that useful comparisons
across time periods and across grantors can be made. The department of revenue
may add other information to the report as the department of revenue deems
necessary to evaluate business subsidies. Among the information in the summary
and compilation report, the department of revenue must include:

(a) Total amount of
subsidies awarded in each development region of the state;

(b) Distribution of
business subsidy amounts by size of the business subsidy;

(c) Distribution of
business subsidy amounts by time category, such as monthly or quarterly;

(d) Distribution of
subsidies by type and by public purpose;

(e) Number of part-time
and full-time jobs within separate bands of wages; and

(f) Benefits paid
within separate bands of wages.

(3) The department of
revenue shall forward the compilation and summary report to the house of
representatives committee on trade and economic development and the senate
committee on economic development and telecommunications by December 31st of
each year.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
5. Sections 1 through 4 of
this act are each added to chapter 42.17 RCW.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 6. This act applies to all
business subsidies entered into or state appropriations authorized after
September 30, 2001.

---
END ---