BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF
WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1. RCW 3.62.060 and 1992 c
62 s 8 are each amended to read as follows:

Clerks of the district
courts shall collect the following fees for their official services:

(1) In any civil action
commenced before or transferred to a district court, the plaintiff shall, at
the time of such commencement or transfer, pay to such court a filing fee of
thirty-one dollars plus any surcharge authorized by RCW 7.75.035. No party
shall be compelled to pay to the court any other fees or charges up to and
including the rendition of judgment in the action other than those listed.

(2) For issuing a writ
of garnishment or other writ a fee of six dollars.

(3) For filing a
supplemental proceeding a fee of twelve dollars.

(4) For demanding a
jury in a civil case a fee of ((fifty)) one hundred twenty-five
dollars to be paid by the person demanding a jury.

(5) For preparing a
transcript of a judgment a fee of six dollars.

(6) For certifying any
document on file or of record in the clerk's office a fee of five dollars.

(7) For preparing the
record of a case for appeal to superior court a fee of forty dollars including
any costs of tape duplication as governed by the rules of appeal for courts of
limited jurisdiction (RALJ).

(8) For duplication of
part or all of the electronic tape or tapes of a proceeding ten dollars per
tape.

The fees or charges
imposed under this section shall be allowed as court costs whenever a judgment
for costs is awarded.

Sec. 2. RCW 12.12.030 and 1981 c
260 s 3 are each amended to read as follows:

After the appearance of
the defendant, and before the justice ((shall proceed to)) enquires
into the merits of the cause, either party may demand a jury to try the action,
which jury shall be composed of six good and lawful persons having the
qualifications of jurors in the superior court of the same county, unless the
parties ((shall)) agree upon a lesser number: PROVIDED, That the party
demanding the jury shall first pay to the justice the sum of one hundred
twenty-five dollars, which shall be paid over by the justice to the county, and
((said)) such amount shall be taxed as costs against the losing
party.

Sec. 3. RCW 10.46.190 and 1977
ex.s. c 248 s 1 are each amended to read as follows:

Every
person convicted of a crime or held to bail to keep the peace shall be liable
to all the costs of the proceedings against him or her, including, when
tried by a jury in the superior court, a jury fee as provided for in civil
actions, and when tried by a jury ((before a committing magistrate,)) in
a limited jurisdiction court, a jury fee of one hundred twenty-five dollars
((for jury fee)), for which judgment shall be rendered and collection
had as in cases of fines. The jury fee, when collected for a case tried by the
superior court, shall be paid to the clerk, to be ((by him)) applied by
the clerk as the jury fee in civil cases is applied. The jury fee, when
collected for a case tried by a limited jurisdiction court, shall be paid to
the clerk of the court and is not subject to division under RCW 3.62.020 and
3.62.040.

---
END ---