BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF
WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1. RCW 3.66.070 and 2000 c
111 s 4 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) All criminal
actions shall be brought in the district where the alleged violation occurred:
PROVIDED, That (((1))) (a) the prosecuting attorney may file
felony cases in the district in which the county seat is located, (((2)))
(b) with the consent of the defendant criminal actions other than those
arising out of violations of city ordinances may be brought in or transferred
to the district in which the county seat is located, (((3))) (c)
if the alleged violation relates to driving, or being in actual physical
control of, a motor vehicle while under the influence of intoxicating liquor or
any drug and the alleged violation occurred within a judicial district which
has been designated an enhanced enforcement district under RCW 2.56.110, the
charges may be filed in that district or in a district within the same county
which is adjacent to the district in which the alleged violation occurred, and
(((4))) (d) a district court participating in the program
established by the office of the administrator for the courts pursuant to RCW
2.56.160 shall have jurisdiction to take recognizance, approve bail, and
arraign defendants held within its jurisdiction on warrants issued by any other
court of limited jurisdiction participating in the program.

(2) In the event of
an emergency created by act of nature, civil unrest, technological failure, or
other hazardous condition, temporary venue for court of limited jurisdiction
matters may be had in a court district not impacted by the emergency. Such
emergency venue is appropriate only for the duration of the emergency.

(3) A
criminal action commenced under a local ordinance is deemed to be properly
heard by the court of original jurisdiction even though the hearing may take
place by video or other electronic means as approved by the supreme court and
the defendant is appearing by an electronic method from a location outside the
court's geographic jurisdiction or boundaries.

--- END ---