BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF
WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1. RCW 13.32A.030 and 2000
c 123 s 2 are each amended to read as follows:

As used in this chapter
the following terms have the meanings indicated unless the context clearly
requires otherwise:

(1) "Abuse or
neglect" means the injury, sexual abuse, sexual exploitation, negligent
treatment, or maltreatment of a child by any person under circumstances which
indicate that the child's health, welfare, and safety is harmed, excluding
conduct permitted under RCW 9A.16.100. An abused child is a child who has been
subjected to child abuse or neglect as defined in this section.

(2) "Administrator"
means the individual who has the daily administrative responsibility of a
crisis residential center, or his or her designee.

(3) "At-risk
youth" means a juvenile:

(a) Who is absent from
home for at least seventy-two consecutive hours without consent of his or her
parent;

(b) Who is beyond the
control of his or her parent such that the child's behavior endangers the
health, safety, or welfare of the child or any other person; ((or))

(c) Who has a substance
abuse problem for which there are no pending criminal charges related to the
substance abuse; or

(d) Who refuses or
fails to comply with the compulsory school attendance laws as provided under
chapter 28A.225 RCW in addition to either (a), (b), or (c) of this subsection.

(4) "Child,"
"juvenile," and "youth" mean any unemancipated individual
who is under the chronological age of eighteen years.

(5) "Child in need
of services" means a juvenile:

(a) Who is beyond the
control of his or her parent such that the child's behavior endangers the
health, safety, or welfare of the child or other person;

(b) Who has been
reported to law enforcement as absent without consent for at least twenty-four
consecutive hours on two or more separate occasions from the home of either
parent, a crisis residential center, an out-of-home placement, or a
court-ordered placement; and

(i) Has exhibited a
serious substance abuse problem; or

(ii) Has exhibited
behaviors that create a serious risk of harm to the health, safety, or welfare
of the child or any other person; or

(c)(i) Who is in need
of: (A) Necessary services, including food, shelter, health care, clothing, or
education; or (B) services designed to maintain or reunite the family;

(ii) Who lacks access
to, or has declined to utilize, these services; and

(iii) Whose parents
have evidenced continuing but unsuccessful efforts to maintain the family
structure or are unable or unwilling to continue efforts to maintain the family
structure.

(6) "Child in need
of services petition" means a petition filed in juvenile court by a
parent, child, or the department seeking adjudication of placement of the
child.

(7) "Crisis
residential center" means a secure or semi-secure facility established
pursuant to chapter 74.13 RCW.

(8)
"Custodian" means the person or entity who has the legal right to the
custody of the child.

(9)
"Department" means the department of social and health services.

(10) "Extended
family member" means an adult who is a grandparent, brother, sister,
stepbrother, stepsister, uncle, aunt, or first cousin with whom the child has a
relationship and is comfortable, and who is willing and available to care for
the child.

(11)
"Guardian" means that person or agency that (a) has been appointed as
the guardian of a child in a legal proceeding other than a proceeding under
chapter 13.34 RCW, and (b) has the right to legal custody of the child pursuant
to such appointment. The term "guardian" does not include a
"dependency guardian" appointed pursuant to a proceeding under
chapter 13.34 RCW.

(12)
"Multidisciplinary team" means a group formed to provide assistance
and support to a child who is an at-risk youth or a child in need of services
and his or her parent. The team shall include the parent, a department case
worker, a local government representative when authorized by the local
government, and when appropriate, members from the mental health and substance
abuse disciplines. The team may also include, but is not limited to, the following
persons: Educators, law enforcement personnel, probation officers, employers,
church persons, tribal members, therapists, medical personnel, social service
providers, placement providers, and extended family members. The team members
shall be volunteers who do not receive compensation while acting in a capacity
as a team member, unless the member's employer chooses to provide compensation
or the member is a state employee.

(13) "Out-of-home
placement" means a placement in a foster family home or group care
facility licensed pursuant to chapter 74.15 RCW or placement in a home, other
than that of the child's parent, guardian, or legal custodian, not required to
be licensed pursuant to chapter 74.15 RCW.

(14) "Parent"
means the parent or parents who have the legal right to custody of the child.
"Parent" includes custodian or guardian.

(15) "Secure
facility" means a crisis residential center, or portion thereof, that has
locking doors, locking windows, or a secured perimeter, designed and operated
to prevent a child from leaving without permission of the facility staff.

(16) "Semi-secure
facility" means any facility, including but not limited to crisis
residential centers or specialized foster family homes, operated in a manner to
reasonably assure that youth placed there will not run away. Pursuant to rules
established by the department, the facility administrator shall establish
reasonable hours for residents to come and go from the facility such that no
residents are free to come and go at all hours of the day and night. To
prevent residents from taking unreasonable actions, the facility administrator,
where appropriate, may condition a resident's leaving the facility upon the
resident being accompanied by the administrator or the administrator's designee
and the resident may be required to notify the administrator or the
administrator's designee of any intent to leave, his or her intended
destination, and the probable time of his or her return to the center.

(17) "Staff secure
facility" means a structured group care facility licensed under rules
adopted by the department with a ratio of at least one adult staff member to
every two children.

(18) "Temporary
out-of-home placement" means an out-of-home placement of not more than
fourteen days ordered by the court at a fact-finding hearing on a child in need
of services petition.

Sec. 2. RCW 13.32A.160 and 2000
c 123 s 19 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) When a proper child
in need of services petition to approve an out-of-home placement is filed under
RCW 13.32A.120, 13.32A.140, or 13.32A.150 the juvenile court shall: (a)(i)
Schedule a fact-finding hearing to be held: (A) For a child who resides in a
place other than his or her parent's home and other than an out-of-home
placement, within five calendar days unless the last calendar day is a
Saturday, Sunday, or holiday, in which case the hearing shall be held on the
preceding judicial day; or (B) for a child living at home or in an out-of-home
placement, within ten days; and (ii) notify the parent, child, and the
department of such date; (b) notify the parent of the right to be represented
by counsel and, if indigent, to have counsel appointed for him or her by the
court; (c) appoint legal counsel for the child; (d) inform the child and his or
her parent of the legal consequences of the court approving or disapproving a
child in need of services petition; (e) notify the parents of their rights
under this chapter and chapters 11.88, 13.34, 70.96A, and 71.34 RCW, including
the right to file a motion requesting that the court convert the petition to
an at-risk youth petition, the right to submit an application for admission of
their child to a treatment facility for alcohol, chemical dependency, or mental
health treatment, and the right to file a guardianship petition; and (f) notify
all parties, including the department, of their right to present evidence at
the fact-finding hearing.

(2) Upon filing of a
child in need of services petition, the child may be placed, if not already
placed, by the department in a crisis residential center, foster family home,
group home facility licensed under chapter 74.15 RCW, or any other suitable
residence other than a HOPE center to be determined by the department. The
court may place a child in a crisis residential center for a temporary
out-of-home placement as long as the requirements of RCW 13.32A.125 are met.

(3) If the child has
been placed in a foster family home or group care facility under chapter 74.15
RCW, the child shall remain there, or in any other suitable residence as
determined by the department, pending resolution of the petition by the court.
Any placement may be reviewed by the court within three judicial days upon the
request of the juvenile or the juvenile's parent.

Sec. 3. RCW 13.32A.170 and 2000
c 123 s 20 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) The court shall
hold a fact-finding hearing to consider a proper child in need of services
petition, giving due weight to the intent of the legislature that families have
the right to place reasonable restrictions and rules upon their children,
appropriate to the individual child's developmental level. The court may
appoint legal counsel and/or a guardian ad litem to represent the child and
advise parents of their right to be represented by legal counsel. At the
commencement of the hearing, the court shall advise the parents of their rights
as set forth in RCW 13.32A.160(1). If the court approves or denies a child in
need of services petition, a written statement of the reasons must be filed.

(2) The court may
approve an order stating that the child shall be placed in a residence other
than the home of his or her parent only if it is established by a preponderance
of the evidence, including a departmental recommendation for approval or
dismissal of the petition, that:

(a) The child is a
child in need of services as defined in RCW 13.32A.030(5);

(b) If the petitioner
is a child, he or she has made a reasonable effort to resolve the conflict;

(c) Reasonable efforts
have been made to prevent or eliminate the need for removal of the child from
the child's home and to make it possible for the child to return home; and

(d) A suitable
out-of-home placement resource is available.

The court may not grant
a petition filed by the child or the department if it is established that the
petition is based only upon a dislike of reasonable rules or reasonable
discipline established by the parent.

The court may not grant
the petition if the child is the subject of a proceeding under chapter 13.34
RCW.

(3) Following the
fact-finding hearing the court shall: (a) Approve a child in need of services
petition and, if appropriate, enter a temporary out-of-home placement for a
period not to exceed fourteen days pending approval of a disposition decision
to be made under RCW 13.32A.179(2); (b) approve ((an at-risk youth petition
filed by the parents and dismiss the child in need of services petition)) the
parent's motion to convert the petition to an at-risk youth petition and
approve the at-risk youth petition; or (c) dismiss the petition.

At any time the court
may order the department to review the case to determine whether the case is
appropriate for a dependency petition under chapter 13.34 RCW.

Sec. 4. RCW 13.32A.179 and 2000
c 123 s 21 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) A disposition
hearing shall be held no later than fourteen days after the approval of the
temporary out-of-home placement. The parents, child, and department shall be
notified by the court of the time and place of the hearing.

(2) At the conclusion of
the disposition hearing, the court may: (a) Reunite the family and dismiss the
petition; (b) approve ((an at-risk youth petition filed by the parents and
dismiss the child in need of services petition)) the parent's motion to
convert the petition to an at-risk youth petition and approve the at-risk youth
petition; (c) approve an out-of-home placement requested in the child in
need of services petition by the parents; or (d) order an out-of-home placement
at the request of the child or the department not to exceed ninety days.

At any time the court
may order the department to review the matter for purposes of filing a
dependency petition under chapter 13.34 RCW. Whether or not the court approves
or orders an out-of-home placement, the court may also order any conditions of
supervision as set forth in RCW 13.32A.196(3).

(3) The court may only
enter an order under subsection (2)(d) of this section if it finds by clear,
cogent, and convincing evidence that: (a)(i) The order is in the best interest
of the family; (ii) the parents have not requested an out-of-home placement;
(iii) the parents have not exercised any other right listed in RCW
13.32A.160(1)(e); (iv) the child has made reasonable efforts to resolve the
problems that led to the filing of the petition; (v) the problems cannot be
resolved by delivery of services to the family during continued placement of
the child in the parental home; (vi) reasonable efforts have been made to
prevent or eliminate the need for removal of the child from the child's home
and to make it possible for the child to return home; and (vii) a suitable
out-of-home placement resource is available; (b)(i) the order is in the best
interest of the child; and (ii) the parents are unavailable; or (c) the
parent's actions cause an imminent threat to the child's health or safety.

(4) The court may order
the department to submit a dispositional plan if such a plan would assist the
court in ordering a suitable disposition in the case. The plan, if ordered,
shall address the needs of the child, and the perceived needs of the parents if
the order was entered under subsection (2)(d) of this section or if
specifically agreed to by the parents. If the parents do not agree or the
order was not entered under subsection (2)(d) of this section the plan may only
make recommendations regarding services in which the parents may voluntarily
participate. If the court orders the department to prepare a plan, the
department shall provide copies of the plan to the parent, the child, and the
court. If the parties or the court desire the department to be involved in any
future proceedings or case plan development, the department shall be provided
with timely notification of all court hearings.

(5) At any time
during the pendency of a child in need of services petition or following
approval of a child in need of services petition, the court may, subject to
available resources, order that a risk and needs assessment of the child be
conducted.

(6) A child who
fails to comply with a court order issued under this section shall be subject
to contempt proceedings, as provided in this chapter, but only if the
noncompliance occurs within one year after the entry of the order.

(((6))) (7)
After the court approves or orders an out-of-home placement, the parents or the
department may request, and the court may grant, dismissal of the child in need
of services proceeding when it is not feasible for the department to provide
services due to one or more of the following circumstances:

(a) The child has been
absent from court approved placement for thirty consecutive days or more;

(b) The parents or the
child, or all of them, refuse to cooperate in available, appropriate
intervention aimed at reunifying the family; or

(c) The department has
exhausted all available and appropriate resources that would result in
reunification.

(((7))) (8)
The court shall dismiss a placement made under subsection (2)(c) of this
section upon the request of the parents.

Sec. 5. RCW 13.32A.190 and 1996
c 133 s 25 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) Upon making a
dispositional order under RCW 13.32A.179, the court shall schedule the matter
on the calendar for review within three months, advise the parties of the date
thereof, appoint legal counsel and/or a guardian ad litem to represent the
child at the review hearing, advise parents of their right to be represented by
legal counsel at the review hearing, and notify the parties of their rights to
present evidence at the hearing. Where resources are available, the court
shall encourage the parent and child to participate in programs for
reconciliation of their conflict.

(2) At the review
hearing, the court shall approve or disapprove the continuation of the
dispositional plan in accordance with this chapter. The court shall determine
whether reasonable efforts have been made to reunify the family and make it
possible for the child to return home. The court shall discontinue the
placement and order that the child return home if the court has reasonable grounds
to believe that the parents have made reasonable efforts to resolve the
conflict and the court has reason to believe that the child's refusal to return
home is capricious. If out-of-home placement is continued, the court may
modify the dispositional plan.

(3) The court may
hold a hearing to review a child in need of services matter at any time during
the pendency of the petition or following approval of the petition.

(4) Out-of-home
placement may not be continued ((past one hundred eighty days from the day
the review hearing commenced)) beyond nine months from entry of the
dispositional order. The court shall order the child to return to the home
of the parent at the expiration of the placement. If an out-of-home placement
is disapproved prior to ((one hundred eighty days)) nine months,
the court shall enter an order requiring the child to return to the home of the
child's parent.

(((4))) (5)
The parents and the department may request, and the juvenile court may grant,
dismissal of an out-of-home placement order when it is not feasible for the
department to provide services due to one or more of the following
circumstances:

(a) The child has been
absent from court approved placement for thirty consecutive days or more;

(b) The parents or the
child, or all of them, refuse to cooperate in available, appropriate
intervention aimed at reunifying the family; or

(c) The department has
exhausted all available and appropriate resources that would result in
reunification.

(((5))) (6)
The court shall terminate a placement made under this section upon the request
of a parent unless the placement is made pursuant to RCW 13.32A.179(3).

(((6))) (7)
The court may dismiss a child in need of services petition filed by a parent at
any time if the court finds good cause to believe that continuation of
out-of-home placement would serve no useful purpose.

(((7))) (8)
The court shall dismiss a child in need of services proceeding if the child is
the subject of a proceeding under chapter 13.34 RCW.

Sec. 6. RCW 13.32A.196 and 2000
c 123 s 24 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) A dispositional
hearing shall be held no later than fourteen days after the fact-finding
hearing. Each party shall be notified of the time and date of the hearing.

(2) At the
dispositional hearing regarding an adjudicated at-risk youth, the court shall
consider the recommendations of the parties and the recommendations of any
dispositional plan submitted by the department. The court may enter a
dispositional order that will assist the parent in maintaining the care,
custody, and control of the child and assist the family to resolve family
conflicts or problems.

(3) The court may set
conditions of supervision for the child that include:

(a) Regular school
attendance;

(b) Counseling;

(c) Participation in a
substance abuse or mental health outpatient treatment program;

(d) Reporting on a
regular basis to the department or any other designated person or agency; and

(e) Any other condition
the court deems an appropriate condition of supervision including but not
limited to: Employment, participation in an anger management program, and
refraining from using alcohol or drugs.

(4) No dispositional
order or condition of supervision ordered by a court pursuant to this section
shall include involuntary commitment of a child for substance abuse or mental
health treatment.

(5) The court may order
the parent to participate in counseling services or any other services for the
child requiring parental participation. The parent shall cooperate with the
court-ordered case plan and shall take necessary steps to help implement the
case plan. The parent shall be financially responsible for costs related to
the court-ordered plan; however, this requirement shall not affect the
eligibility of the parent or child for public assistance or other benefits to
which the parent or child may otherwise be entitled.

(6) The parent may
request dismissal of an at-risk youth proceeding or out-of-home placement at
any time. Upon such a request, the court shall dismiss the matter and cease
court supervision of the child unless: (a) A contempt action is pending in the
case; (b) a petition has been filed under RCW 13.32A.150 and a hearing has not
yet been held under RCW 13.32A.179; or (c) an order has been entered under RCW
13.32A.179(3) and the court retains jurisdiction under that subsection. The
court may retain jurisdiction over the matter for the purpose of concluding any
pending contempt proceedings, including the full satisfaction of any penalties
imposed as a result of a contempt finding.

(7) An at-risk youth
proceeding converted from a truancy proceeding under RCW 28A.225.035(16) shall
revert to being a truancy proceeding if the at-risk youth petition is dismissed
pursuant to this section.

(8) The court
may order the department to monitor compliance with the dispositional order,
assist in coordinating the provision of court-ordered services, and submit
reports at subsequent review hearings regarding the status of the case.

(9) At any time
during the pendency of an at-risk youth petition or following approval of an
at-risk youth petition, the court may, subject to available resources, order
that a risk and needs assessment of the child be conducted.

Sec. 7. RCW 13.32A.198 and 1990
c 276 s 15 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) Upon making a
disposition regarding an adjudicated at-risk youth, the court shall schedule
the matter on the calendar for review within three months, advise the parties
of the date thereof, appoint legal counsel for the child, advise the parent of
the right to be represented by legal counsel at the review hearing at the
parent's own expense, and notify the parties of their rights to present evidence
at the hearing.

(2) At the review
hearing, the court shall approve or disapprove the continuation of court
supervision in accordance with the goal of assisting the parent to maintain the
care, custody, and control of the child. The court shall determine whether the
parent and child are complying with the dispositional plan. If court
supervision is continued, the court may modify the dispositional plan.

(3) The court may
hold a hearing to review an at-risk youth matter at any time during the
pendency of the petition or following approval of the petition.

(4) Court
supervision of the child may not be continued ((past one hundred eighty days
from the day the review hearing commenced)) beyond nine months from
entry of the dispositional order unless the court finds, and the parent
agrees, that there are compelling reasons for an extension of supervision. Any
extension granted pursuant to this subsection shall not exceed ninety days.

(((4))) (5)
The court may dismiss an at-risk youth proceeding at any time if the court
finds good cause to believe that continuation of court supervision would serve
no useful purpose or that the parent is not cooperating with the court-ordered
case plan. The court shall dismiss an at-risk youth proceeding if the child is
the subject of a proceeding under chapter 13.34 RCW.

Sec. 8. RCW 28A.225.035 and 1999
c 319 s 3 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) A petition for a
civil action under RCW 28A.225.030 or 28A.225.015 shall consist of a written
notification to the court alleging that:

(a) The child has
unexcused absences during the current school year;

(b) Actions taken by
the school district have not been successful in substantially reducing the
child's absences from school; and

(c) Court intervention
and supervision are necessary to assist the school district or parent to reduce
the child's absences from school.

(2) The petition shall
set forth the name, age, school, and residence of the child and the names and
residence of the child's parents.

(3) The petition shall
set forth facts that support the allegations in this section and shall
generally request relief available under this chapter and provide information
about what the court might order under RCW 28A.225.090.

(4) When a petition is
filed under RCW 28A.225.030 or 28A.225.015, the juvenile court shall schedule a
hearing at which the court shall consider the petition, or if the court
determines that a referral to an available community truancy board would
substantially reduce the child's unexcused absences, the court may refer the
case to a community truancy board under the jurisdiction of the juvenile court.

(5) If a referral is
made to a community truancy board, the truancy board must meet with the child,
a parent, and the school district representative and enter into an agreement
with the petitioner and respondent regarding expectations and any actions
necessary to address the child's truancy within thirty days of the referral.
If the petition is based on RCW 28A.225.015, the child shall not be required to
attend and the agreement under this subsection shall be between the truancy
board, the school district, and the child's parent. The agreement shall be
presented to the juvenile court for its approval.

(6) The court shall
approve the agreement by order or schedule a hearing. The court may, if the
school district and community truancy board agree, permit the truancy board to
provide continued supervision over the student, or parent if the petition is
based on RCW 28A.225.015, and report on compliance with the order.

(7) If the truancy
board fails to reach an agreement, the truancy board shall return the case to
the juvenile court for a hearing.

(8) Notwithstanding the
provisions in subsection (4) of this section, a hearing shall not be required
if other actions by the court would substantially reduce the child's unexcused
absences. When a juvenile court hearing is held, the court shall:

(a) Separately notify
the child, the parent of the child, and the school district of the hearing;

(b) Notify the parent
and the child of their rights to present evidence at the hearing; and

(c) Notify the parent
and the child of the options and rights available under chapter 13.32A RCW.

(9) The court may
require the attendance of the child if eight years old or older, the parents,
and the school district at any hearing on a petition filed under RCW
28A.225.030.

(10) A school district
is responsible for determining who shall represent the school district at
hearings on a petition filed under RCW 28A.225.030 or 28A.225.015.

(11) The court may
permit the first hearing to be held without requiring that either party be
represented by legal counsel, and to be held without a guardian ad litem for
the child under RCW 4.08.050. At the request of the school district, the court
shall permit a school district representative who is not an attorney to
represent the school district at any future hearings.

(12) If the allegations
in the petition are established by a preponderance of the evidence, the court
shall grant the petition and enter an order assuming jurisdiction to intervene
for the period of time determined by the court, after considering the facts
alleged in the petition and the circumstances of the juvenile, to most likely
cause the juvenile to return to and remain in school while the juvenile is
subject to this chapter. In no case may the order expire before the end of the
school year in which it is entered.

(13) If the court
assumes jurisdiction, the school district shall regularly report to the court
any additional unexcused absences by the child.

(14) Community truancy
boards and the courts shall coordinate, to the extent possible, proceedings and
actions pertaining to children who are subject to truancy petitions and at-risk
youth petitions in RCW 13.32A.191 or child in need of services petitions in RCW
13.32A.140.

(15) If after a
juvenile court assumes jurisdiction in one county the child relocates to
another county, the juvenile court in the receiving county shall, upon the
request of a school district or parent, assume jurisdiction of the petition
filed in the previous county.

(16) At any time
following the filing of a truancy petition and subsequent to a family
assessment as provided in RCW 13.32A.150(1), a parent may file with the court a
motion to convert the truancy petition to an at-risk youth petition under RCW
13.32A.191. The court shall approve the motion unless there is a pending
contempt action under this chapter or the court has reason to believe the
conversion would not be in the best interest of the child.

Sec. 9. RCW 28A.225.090 and 2000
c 162 s 6 and 2000 c 61 s 1 are each reenacted and amended to read as follows:

(1) A court may order a
child subject to a petition under RCW 28A.225.035 to do one or more of the
following:

(a) Attend the child's
current school, and set forth minimum attendance requirements, including
suspensions;

(b) If there is space
available and the program can provide educational services appropriate for the
child, order the child to attend another public school, an alternative
education program, center, a skill center, dropout prevention program, or
another public educational program;

(c) Attend a private
nonsectarian school or program including an education center. Before ordering
a child to attend an approved or certified private nonsectarian school or
program, the court shall: (i) Consider the public and private programs
available; (ii) find that placement is in the best interest of the child; and
(iii) find that the private school or program is willing to accept the child
and will not charge any fees in addition to those established by contract with
the student's school district. If the court orders the child to enroll in a
private school or program, the child's school district shall contract with the
school or program to provide educational services for the child. The school
district shall not be required to contract for a weekly rate that exceeds the
state general apportionment dollars calculated on a weekly basis generated by
the child and received by the district. A school district shall not be
required to enter into a contract that is longer than the remainder of the
school year. A school district shall not be required to enter into or continue
a contract if the child is no longer enrolled in the district;

(d) Be referred to a
community truancy board, if available; or

(e) Submit to testing
for the use of controlled substances or alcohol based on a determination that
such testing is appropriate to the circumstances and behavior of the child and
will facilitate the child's compliance with the mandatory attendance law and,
if any test ordered under this subsection indicates the use of controlled
substances or alcohol, order the minor to abstain from the unlawful consumption
of controlled substances or alcohol and adhere to the recommendations of the
drug assessment at no expense to the school.

(2) If the child fails
to comply with the court order, the court may order the child to be placed in
confinement for contempt, either in a juvenile detention facility operated by
or under a contract with a county or in a secure facility that is a separate,
secure section of a juvenile detention facility, or may impose alternatives to
confinement such as community service. Subject to available resources, the
court may order that a risk and needs assessment of the child be conducted, and
that the matter be scheduled for a review hearing within fourteen days.
Pursuant to the results of the risk and needs assessment, the court may order
conditions of supervision, including regular school attendance, counseling,
participation in a substance abuse or mental health outpatient treatment
program, and any other condition the court deems an appropriate condition of
supervision. Failure by a child to comply with an order issued under this
subsection shall not be subject to detention for a period greater than that
permitted pursuant to a civil contempt proceeding against a child under chapter
13.32A RCW. In no case may a child in contempt be confined in a secure
facility that is freestanding outside a juvenile detention facility.

(3) Any parent
violating any of the provisions of either RCW 28A.225.010, 28A.225.015, or
28A.225.080 shall be fined not more than twenty-five dollars for each day of
unexcused absence from school. It shall be a defense for a parent charged with
violating RCW 28A.225.010 to show that he or she exercised reasonable diligence
in attempting to cause a child in his or her custody to attend school or that
the child's school did not perform its duties as required in RCW 28A.225.020.
The court may order the parent to provide community service instead of imposing
a fine. Any fine imposed pursuant to this section may be suspended upon the
condition that a parent charged with violating RCW 28A.225.010 shall
participate with the school and the child in a supervised plan for the child's
attendance at school or upon condition that the parent attend a conference or
conferences scheduled by a school for the purpose of analyzing the causes of a
child's absence.

(4) If a child
continues to be truant after entering into a court-approved order with the
truancy board under RCW 28A.225.035, the juvenile court shall find the child in
contempt, and the court may order the child to be subject to detention, as
provided in RCW 7.21.030(2)(e), or may impose alternatives to detention such as
meaningful community service. Subject to available resources, the court may
order that a risk and needs assessment of the child be conducted, and that the
matter be scheduled for a review hearing within fourteen days. Pursuant to the
results of the risk and needs assessment, the court may order conditions of
supervision, including regular school attendance, counseling, participation in
a substance abuse or mental health outpatient treatment program, and any other
condition the court deems an appropriate condition of supervision. Failure
by a child to comply with an order issued under this subsection may not subject
a child to detention for a period greater than that permitted under a civil
contempt proceeding against a child under chapter 13.32A RCW.

(5) Subsections (1),
(2), and (4) of this section shall not apply to a six or seven year-old child
required to attend public school under RCW 28A.225.015.

Sec. 10. RCW 28A.225.090 and 2000
c 162 s 15 and 2000 c 61 s 1 are each reenacted and amended to read as follows:

(1) A court may order a
child subject to a petition under RCW 28A.225.035 to do one or more of the
following:

(a) Attend the child's
current school, and set forth minimum attendance requirements, including
suspensions;

(b) If there is space
available and the program can provide educational services appropriate for the
child, order the child to attend another public school, an alternative
education program, center, a skill center, dropout prevention program, or
another public educational program;

(c) Attend a private
nonsectarian school or program including an education center. Before ordering
a child to attend an approved or certified private nonsectarian school or
program, the court shall: (i) Consider the public and private programs
available; (ii) find that placement is in the best interest of the child; and
(iii) find that the private school or program is willing to accept the child
and will not charge any fees in addition to those established by contract with
the student's school district. If the court orders the child to enroll in a
private school or program, the child's school district shall contract with the
school or program to provide educational services for the child. The school
district shall not be required to contract for a weekly rate that exceeds the
state general apportionment dollars calculated on a weekly basis generated by
the child and received by the district. A school district shall not be
required to enter into a contract that is longer than the remainder of the
school year. A school district shall not be required to enter into or continue
a contract if the child is no longer enrolled in the district;

(d) Be referred to a
community truancy board, if available; or

(e) Submit to testing
for the use of controlled substances or alcohol based on a determination that
such testing is appropriate to the circumstances and behavior of the child and
will facilitate the child's compliance with the mandatory attendance law and,
if any test ordered under this subsection indicates the use of controlled
substances or alcohol, order the minor to abstain from the unlawful consumption
of controlled substances or alcohol and adhere to the recommendations of the
drug assessment at no expense to the school.

(2) If the child fails
to comply with the court order, the court may order the child to be subject to
detention, as provided in RCW 7.21.030(2)(e), or may impose alternatives to
detention such as community service. Subject to available resources, the
court may order that a risk and needs assessment of the child be conducted, and
that the matter be scheduled for a review hearing within fourteen days.
Pursuant to the results of the risk and needs assessment, the court may order
conditions of supervision, including regular school attendance, counseling,
participation in a substance abuse or mental health outpatient treatment
program, and any other condition the court deems an appropriate condition of
supervision. Failure by a child to comply with an order issued under this
subsection shall not be subject to detention for a period greater than that
permitted pursuant to a civil contempt proceeding against a child under chapter
13.32A RCW.

(3) Any parent
violating any of the provisions of either RCW 28A.225.010, 28A.225.015, or
28A.225.080 shall be fined not more than twenty-five dollars for each day of
unexcused absence from school. It shall be a defense for a parent charged with
violating RCW 28A.225.010 to show that he or she exercised reasonable diligence
in attempting to cause a child in his or her custody to attend school or that
the child's school did not perform its duties as required in RCW 28A.225.020.
The court may order the parent to provide community service instead of imposing
a fine. Any fine imposed pursuant to this section may be suspended upon the
condition that a parent charged with violating RCW 28A.225.010 shall
participate with the school and the child in a supervised plan for the child's
attendance at school or upon condition that the parent attend a conference or
conferences scheduled by a school for the purpose of analyzing the causes of a
child's absence.

(4) If a child
continues to be truant after entering into a court-approved order with the
truancy board under RCW 28A.225.035, the juvenile court shall find the child in
contempt, and the court may order the child to be subject to detention, as
provided in RCW 7.21.030(2)(e), or may impose alternatives to detention such as
meaningful community service. Subject to available resources, the court may
order that a risk and needs assessment of the child be conducted, and that the
matter be scheduled for a review hearing within fourteen days. Pursuant to the
results of the risk and needs assessment, the court may order conditions of
supervision, including regular school attendance, counseling, participation in
a substance abuse or mental health outpatient treatment program, and any other
condition the court deems an appropriate condition of supervision. Failure
by a child to comply with an order issued under this subsection may not subject
a child to detention for a period greater than that permitted under a civil
contempt proceeding against a child under chapter 13.32A RCW.

(5) Subsections (1),
(2), and (4) of this section shall not apply to a six or seven year-old child
required to attend public school under RCW 28A.225.015.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
11. If specific funding for
the purposes of this act, referencing this act by bill or chapter number, is
not provided by June 30, 2001, in the omnibus appropriations act, this act is
null and void.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
12. Section 9 of this act
expires July 1, 2002.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 13. Section 10 of this act takes
effect July 1, 2002.

---
END ---