BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF
WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec.
1. A new section is added
to chapter 82.04 RCW to read as follows:

(1) This chapter does
not apply to amounts received by a health care provider from the United States
or any instrumentality of the United States, or from the state of Washington or
any municipal corporation or political subdivision of the state of Washington,
to the same extent provided for health or social welfare organizations under
RCW 82.04.4297.

(2) The definitions in
this subsection apply throughout this section unless the context clearly
requires otherwise.

(a) "Health
professional" means a health care practitioner who is regulated by the
state of Washington.

(b)
"Health care provider" means any health professional, hospital, or
other institution, organization, or person that furnishes any health care
services and is licensed or otherwise authorized to furnish such services.

--- END ---