BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF
WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec.
1. It is the policy of the
state of Washington that laws enacted to protect natural resources and the
environment be enforced. Limitations on governmental abilities to enforce
those laws, due to the high volume of activities to which environmental
standards apply and the finite nature of governmental resources, are recognized.
The purpose of this chapter is to empower citizens to supplement government
enforcement of those laws.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
2. The definitions in this
section apply throughout this chapter unless the context clearly requires
otherwise.

(1) "Citizen"
means any person or persons.

(2) "Person"
means an individual, corporation, partnership, association, state, commission,
or other government entity.

(3) "Environmental
standard or requirement" means:

(a) Any condition
placed in or on the issuance of any permit or authorization under chapter
43.21C RCW;

(b) Any prohibition or
requirement adopted under chapter 36.70A or 90.58 RCW or other zoning or land
use law if the prohibition or requirement has been enacted or adopted for the
purpose of protecting sensitive areas, natural resources, or human health;

(c) The requirement to
have a permit or submit an application pursuant to any condition of a permit or
authorization issued under and any prohibition or requirement of or adopted
under chapters 58.17, 36.70, 35A.63, and 35.63 RCW, platting and zoning
authority for counties and cities.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
3. (1) Except as provided in
subsection (2) of this section, any citizen may commence a civil action on his
or her own behalf against any person who is alleged to have violated an
environmental standard or requirement, or an order issued by a governmental
agency with respect to such a standard or requirement, if there is evidence of
more than one day or instance of violation. Such civil action may be brought
in the superior court for the county in which the alleged violation occurred or
as otherwise provided in chapter 4.12 RCW or RCW 36.01.050. The superior court
shall have jurisdiction to enforce the environmental standard or requirement or
order, to grant other injunctive relief as justice may require, to assess civil
penalties consistent with subsection (5) of this section, and to award costs of
litigation, including reasonable attorneys' and expert witness' fees consistent
with subsection (6) of this section.

(2) No action may be
commenced under subsection (1) of this section:

(a) Prior to sixty days
after the plaintiff has given notice by certified mail or personal service of
the violation; or

(b) If an agency with
authority to enforce the standard or requirement alleged to be violated has
commenced and is diligently prosecuting an administrative or in-court action,
if that action:

(i) Has resulted or
will result in a cessation of all alleged violations;

(ii) Has resulted or
may result in assessment of a monetary penalty in an amount substantially
equivalent to the violator's economic benefit from the violation; and

(iii) Was commenced
before the commencement of an action under subsection (1) of this section.

(3) Notice under this
section shall be by certified mail or personal service:

(a) To the alleged
violator of the standard or requirement;

(b) To the state
attorney general;

(c) To the agency with
primary responsibility for enforcement of the standard or requirement;

(d) Specific enough to
allow the alleged violator to identify the actions, conduct, or circumstances
that will be the subject of the action; and

(e) Considered served
on the postmark date or date of actual service, whichever is earlier.

(4) An action under
subsection (1) of this section may be brought immediately upon giving notice
only if the violations present a substantial risk of immediate and irreparable
endangerment to the environment.

(5) The court, upon
finding violation of an environmental standard or requirement, shall assess a
civil penalty against the violator in an amount not to exceed ten thousand
dollars per violation per day of violation unless justice so requires. In
determining an appropriate penalty, the court shall consider the seriousness of
the violations, any good faith efforts or lack of good faith efforts to, the
duration of the violations, the economic benefit of the violations to the violator,
and such other matters as justice may require. Unless injustice would result,
the court shall assess a civil penalty greater than the economic benefit of the
violations to the violator. Civil penalties assessed under this section shall
be deposited as provided by the statutes upon which the violation is based.

(6) Unless injustice
would result, the court, in issuing any final order in any action brought under
this section, shall award costs of litigation, including reasonable attorneys'
and expert witness' fees, to a prevailing or substantially prevailing party,
payable by the opposing party or parties.

(7) This section does
not restrict any right which any person or class of persons may have under any
statute or common law to seek enforcement of any standard or requirement or to
seek any other relief.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
4. This chapter does not
alter or diminish any legal obligation otherwise required in common law or by
statute or rule, and nothing in this chapter creates or enlarges any defense in
any action to enforce such legal obligation. Penalties and sanctions imposed
under this chapter are in addition to any penalties or sanctions otherwise
prescribed by law. This chapter does not impose any additional liability upon
any state or local government for failure to enforce any violation subject to
this chapter.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 5. Sections 1 through 4 of
this act constitute a new chapter in Title 4 RCW.

---
END ---