BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF
WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1. RCW 36.70A.177 and 1997
c 429 s 23 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) A county or a city
may use a variety of innovative zoning techniques in areas designated as
agricultural lands of long-term commercial significance under RCW 36.70A.170.
The innovative zoning techniques should be designed to conserve agricultural
lands and encourage the agricultural economy. A county or city should
encourage nonagricultural uses to be limited to lands with poor soils or
otherwise not suitable for agricultural purposes.

(2) Innovative zoning
techniques a county or city may consider include, but are not limited to:

(a) Agricultural
zoning, which limits the density of development and restricts or prohibits
nonfarm uses of agricultural land;

(b) Cluster zoning,
which allows new development on one portion of the land, leaving the remainder
in agricultural or open space uses;

(c) Large lot zoning,
which establishes as a minimum lot size the amount of land necessary to achieve
a successful farming practice;

(d) Quarter/quarter
zoning, which permits one residential dwelling on a one-acre minimum lot for
each one-sixteenth of a section of land; and

(e) Sliding scale
zoning, which allows the number of lots for single-family residential purposes
with a minimum lot size of one acre to increase inversely as the size of the
total acreage increases.

(3) A
city or county may develop incentive programs to transfer development rights
from agricultural or open spaces zones to higher densities in urban zones.

--- END ---