BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF
WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1. RCW 36.70A.030 and 1997
c 429 s 3 are each amended to read as follows:

Unless the context
clearly requires otherwise, the definitions in this section apply throughout
this chapter.

(1) "Adopt a
comprehensive land use plan" means to enact a new comprehensive land use
plan or to update an existing comprehensive land use plan.

(2) "Agricultural
land" means land primarily devoted to the commercial production of
horticultural, viticultural, floricultural, dairy, apiary, vegetable, or animal
products or of berries, grain, hay, straw, turf, seed, Christmas trees not
subject to the excise tax imposed by RCW 84.33.100 through 84.33.140, finfish
in upland hatcheries, or livestock, and that has long-term commercial
significance for agricultural production.

(3) "City"
means any city or town, including a code city.

(4) "Comprehensive
land use plan," "comprehensive plan," or "plan" means
a generalized coordinated land use policy statement of the governing body of a
county or city that is adopted pursuant to this chapter.

(5) "Critical areas"
include the following areas and ecosystems: (a) Wetlands; (b) areas with a
critical recharging effect on aquifers used for potable water; (c) fish and
wildlife habitat conservation areas; (d) frequently flooded areas; ((and))
(e) geologically hazardous areas; and (f) shorelines of the state as defined
in RCW 90.58.030.

(6)
"Department" means the department of community, trade, and economic
development.

(7) "Development
regulations" or "regulation" means the controls placed on
development or land use activities by a county or city, including, but not
limited to, zoning ordinances, critical areas ordinances, shoreline master
programs, official controls, planned unit development ordinances, subdivision
ordinances, and binding site plan ordinances together with any amendments
thereto. A development regulation does not include a decision to approve a
project permit application, as defined in RCW 36.70B.020, even though the
decision may be expressed in a resolution or ordinance of the legislative body of
the county or city.

(8) "Forest
land" means land primarily devoted to growing trees for long-term
commercial timber production on land that can be economically and practically
managed for such production, including Christmas trees subject to the excise tax
imposed under RCW 84.33.100 through 84.33.140, and that has long-term
commercial significance. In determining whether forest land is primarily
devoted to growing trees for long-term commercial timber production on land
that can be economically and practically managed for such production, the
following factors shall be considered: (a) The proximity of the land to urban,
suburban, and rural settlements; (b) surrounding parcel size and the
compatibility and intensity of adjacent and nearby land uses; (c) long-term
local economic conditions that affect the ability to manage for timber
production; and (d) the availability of public facilities and services
conducive to conversion of forest land to other uses.

(9) "Geologically
hazardous areas" means areas that because of their susceptibility to
erosion, sliding, earthquake, or other geological events, are not suited to the
siting of commercial, residential, or industrial development consistent with
public health or safety concerns.

(10) "Long-term
commercial significance" includes the growing capacity, productivity, and
soil composition of the land for long-term commercial production, in
consideration with the land's proximity to population areas, and the
possibility of more intense uses of the land.

(11) "Minerals"
include gravel, sand, and valuable metallic substances.

(12) "Public
facilities" include streets, roads, highways, sidewalks, street and road
lighting systems, traffic signals, domestic water systems, storm and sanitary
sewer systems, parks and recreational facilities, and schools.

(13) "Public
services" include fire protection and suppression, law enforcement, public
health, education, recreation, environmental protection, and other governmental
services.

(14) "Rural
character" refers to the patterns of land use and development established
by a county in the rural element of its comprehensive plan:

(a) In which open
space, the natural landscape, and vegetation predominate over the built
environment;

(b) That foster
traditional rural lifestyles, rural-based economies, and opportunities to both
live and work in rural areas;

(c) That provide visual
landscapes that are traditionally found in rural areas and communities;

(d) That are compatible
with the use of the land by wildlife and for fish and wildlife habitat;

(e) That reduce the
inappropriate conversion of undeveloped land into sprawling, low‑density
development;

(f) That generally do
not require the extension of urban governmental services; and

(g) That are consistent
with the protection of natural surface water flows and ground water and surface
water recharge and discharge areas.

(15) "Rural
development" refers to development outside the urban growth area and
outside agricultural, forest, and mineral resource lands designated pursuant to
RCW 36.70A.170. Rural development can consist of a variety of uses and
residential densities, including clustered residential development, at levels
that are consistent with the preservation of rural character and the
requirements of the rural element. Rural development does not refer to
agriculture or forestry activities that may be conducted in rural areas.

(16) "Rural
governmental services" or "rural services" include those public
services and public facilities historically and typically delivered at an
intensity usually found in rural areas, and may include domestic water systems,
fire and police protection services, transportation and public transit
services, and other public utilities associated with rural development and
normally not associated with urban areas. Rural services do not include storm
or sanitary sewers, except as otherwise authorized by RCW 36.70A.110(4).

(17) "Urban
growth" refers to growth that makes intensive use of land for the location
of buildings, structures, and impermeable surfaces to such a degree as to be
incompatible with the primary use of land for the production of food, other
agricultural products, or fiber, or the extraction of mineral resources, rural
uses, rural development, and natural resource lands designated pursuant to RCW
36.70A.170. A pattern of more intensive rural development, as provided in RCW
36.70A.070(5)(d), is not urban growth. When allowed to spread over wide areas,
urban growth typically requires urban governmental services.
"Characterized by urban growth" refers to land having urban growth
located on it, or to land located in relationship to an area with urban growth
on it as to be appropriate for urban growth.

(18) "Urban growth
areas" means those areas designated by a county pursuant to RCW
36.70A.110.

(19) "Urban
governmental services" or "urban services" include those public
services and public facilities at an intensity historically and typically
provided in cities, specifically including storm and sanitary sewer systems,
domestic water systems, street cleaning services, fire and police protection
services, public transit services, and other public utilities associated with
urban areas and normally not associated with rural areas.

(20)
"Wetland" or "wetlands" means areas that are inundated or
saturated by surface water or ground water at a frequency and duration
sufficient to support, and that under normal circumstances do support, a
prevalence of vegetation typically adapted for life in saturated soil
conditions. Wetlands generally include swamps, marshes, bogs, and similar
areas. Wetlands do not include those artificial wetlands intentionally created
from nonwetland sites, including, but not limited to, irrigation and drainage
ditches, grass-lined swales, canals, detention facilities, wastewater treatment
facilities, farm ponds, and landscape amenities, or those wetlands created
after July 1, 1990, that were unintentionally created as a result of the
construction of a road, street, or highway. Wetlands may include those
artificial wetlands intentionally created from nonwetland areas created to
mitigate conversion of wetlands.

Sec. 2. RCW 36.70A.050 and 1990
1st ex.s. c 17 s 5 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) Subject to the
definitions provided in RCW 36.70A.030, the department shall adopt guidelines,
under chapter 34.05 RCW, no later than September 1, 1990, to guide the
classification of: (a) Agricultural lands; (b) forest lands; (c) mineral
resource lands; and (d) critical areas. The department shall consult with the
department of agriculture regarding guidelines for agricultural lands((,))
and the department of natural resources regarding forest lands and
mineral resource lands((, and)). The department shall adopt
guidelines regarding critical areas in cooperation with the department of
ecology ((regarding critical areas)) and the department of fish and
wildlife.

(2) In carrying out its
duties under this section, the department shall consult with interested
parties, including but not limited to: (a) Representatives of cities; (b)
representatives of counties; (c) representatives of developers; (d)
representatives of builders; (e) representatives of owners of agricultural
lands, forest lands, and mining lands; (f) representatives of local economic
development officials; (g) representatives of environmental organizations; (h)
representatives of special districts; (i) representatives of the governor's
office and federal and state agencies; and (j) representatives of Indian
tribes. In addition to the consultation required under this subsection, the
department shall conduct public hearings in the various regions of the state.
The department shall consider the public input obtained at such public hearings
when adopting the guidelines.

(3) The guidelines
under subsection (1) of this section shall be minimum guidelines that apply to
all jurisdictions, but also shall allow for regional differences that exist in
Washington state. The intent of these guidelines is to assist counties and
cities in designating the classification of agricultural lands, forest lands,
mineral resource lands, and critical areas under RCW 36.70A.170.

(4) The guidelines
established by the department under this section regarding classification of
forest lands shall not be inconsistent with guidelines adopted by the
department of natural resources.

Sec. 3. RCW 36.70A.060 and 1998
c 286 s 5 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) Each county ((that
is required or chooses to plan)) planning under RCW 36.70A.040, and
each city within such county, shall adopt development regulations on or before
September 1, 1991, to assure the conservation of agricultural, forest, and
mineral resource lands designated under RCW 36.70A.170. Regulations adopted
under this subsection may not prohibit uses legally existing on any parcel
prior to their adoption and shall remain in effect until the county or city
adopts development regulations pursuant to RCW 36.70A.040. Such regulations
shall assure that the use of lands adjacent to agricultural, forest, or mineral
resource lands shall not interfere with the continued use, in the accustomed
manner and in accordance with best management practices, of these designated lands
for the production of food, agricultural products, or timber, or for the
extraction of minerals. Counties and cities shall require that all plats,
short plats, development permits, and building permits issued for development
activities on, or within five hundred feet of, lands designated as agricultural
lands, forest lands, or mineral resource lands, contain a notice that the
subject property is within or near designated agricultural lands, forest lands,
or mineral resource lands on which a variety of commercial activities may occur
that are not compatible with residential development for certain periods of
limited duration. The notice for mineral resource lands shall also inform that
an application might be made for mining-related activities, including mining,
extraction, washing, crushing, stockpiling, blasting, transporting, and
recycling of minerals.

(2) Each county and
city shall adopt development regulations ((that)) to protect
critical areas that are required to be designated under RCW 36.70A.170. For
counties and cities ((that are required or choose to plan)) planning
under RCW 36.70A.040, such development regulations shall be adopted on or
before September 1, 1991. For the remainder of the counties and cities, such
development regulations shall be adopted on or before March 1, 1992. Counties
and cities shall use the guidelines adopted pursuant to RCW 36.70A.050 and
90.58.060 when adopting development regulations to protect critical areas.
Development regulations to protect critical areas are subject to review and
approval by the department of ecology and the department of fish and wildlife
after adoption as required by section 5 of this act.

(3) Such counties and
cities shall review these designations and development regulations when adopting
their comprehensive plans under RCW 36.70A.040 and implementing development
regulations under RCW 36.70A.120 and may alter such designations and
development regulations to insure consistency.

(4) Forest land and
agricultural land located within urban growth areas shall not be designated by
a county or city as forest land or agricultural land of long-term commercial
significance under RCW 36.70A.170 unless the city or county has enacted a
program authorizing transfer or purchase of development rights.

Sec. 4. RCW 36.70A.106 and 1991
sp.s. c 32 s 8 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) Each county and
city proposing adoption of a comprehensive plan or development regulations
under this chapter shall notify the department of its intent to adopt such plan
or regulations at least sixty days prior to final adoption. State agencies
including the department may provide comments to the county or city on the
proposed comprehensive plan, or proposed development regulations, during the
public review process prior to adoption.

(2) Each county and
city planning under this chapter shall transmit a complete and accurate copy of
its comprehensive plan or development regulations to the department within ten
days after final adoption.

(3) Any amendments for
permanent changes to a comprehensive plan or development regulation that are
proposed by a county or city to its adopted plan or regulations shall be
submitted to the department in the same manner as initial plans and development
regulations under this section. Any amendments to a comprehensive plan or
development regulations that are adopted by a county or city shall be
transmitted to the department in the same manner as the initial plans and
regulations under this section.

(4) Development
regulations to protect critical areas and any amendments to such development
regulations shall be submitted to the department of ecology and the department
of fish and wildlife for review and approval after adoption as required by
section 5 of this act.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
5. A new section is added
to chapter 36.70A RCW to read as follows:

(1) Development
regulations to protect critical areas or amendments to such development
regulations become effective when approved by the department of fish and
wildlife and the department of ecology. At least sixty days before final
adoption, each county or city shall submit these development regulations to the
department of ecology and the department of fish and wildlife for review and
approval.

(2) The department of
ecology and the department of fish and wildlife shall develop a joint program
for public review of and comment on proposed development regulations to protect
critical areas. Upon receipt of proposed development regulations to protect
critical areas, the department of ecology and the department of fish and
wildlife shall:

(a) Provide notice to
and opportunity for written comment by all interested parties of record as a
part of the local government review process for the proposed development
regulations and to all persons, groups, and agencies that have requested in
writing notice of proposed development regulations to protect critical areas
generally or for a specific area, subject matter, or issue. The comment period
shall be at least thirty days, unless the department of ecology and the
department of fish and wildlife determine that the level of complexity or
controversy involved supports a shorter period;

(b) In the discretion
of the department of ecology and the department of fish and wildlife, conduct a
public hearing during the thirty-day comment period in the jurisdiction
proposing the development regulations to protect critical areas;

(c) Within fifteen days
after the close of public comment, request the county or city to review the
issues identified by the public, interested parties, groups, and agencies and
provide a written response as to how the proposed development regulations
address the identified issues; and

(d) Within thirty days
after receipt of the county's or city's response pursuant to (c) of this
subsection, make written findings and conclusions regarding the consistency of
the proposal with the policies of this chapter and chapters 77.12 and 90.58
RCW, and the applicable guidelines adopted pursuant to this chapter and chapter
90.58 RCW; provide a response to the issues identified in (c) of this
subsection; and either approve the proposed development regulations as
submitted, recommend specific changes necessary to make the proposed
development regulations approvable, or deny approval of the proposed
development regulations in those instances where no alteration of the proposed
development regulations appears likely to be consistent with the policies of
this chapter and chapters 77.12 and 90.58 RCW and the applicable guidelines
adopted pursuant to this chapter and chapter 90.58 RCW. The written findings
and conclusions shall be provided to the local government, all interested
persons, parties, groups, and agencies of record on the proposed development regulations.

(3) If either the
department of ecology or the department of fish and wildlife recommends changes
to the proposed development regulations to protect critical areas, the local
government may agree to the proposed changes or submit alternative proposed
development regulations. The proposed development regulations to protect
critical areas take effect when and in such form as approved or adopted by both
the department of ecology and the department of fish and wildlife.

Sec. 6. RCW 36.70A.170 and 1990
1st ex.s. c 17 s 17 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) On or before
September 1, 1991, each county, and each city, shall designate where
appropriate:

(a) Agricultural lands
that are not already characterized by urban growth and that have long-term
significance for the commercial production of food or other agricultural
products;

(b) Forest lands that
are not already characterized by urban growth and that have long-term
significance for the commercial production of timber;

(c) Mineral resource
lands that are not already characterized by urban growth and that have
long-term significance for the extraction of minerals; and

(d) Critical areas.

(2) In making the
designations required by this section, counties and cities shall consider the
guidelines established pursuant to RCW 36.70A.050 and chapter 90.58 RCW as
related to critical areas and shall submit development regulations regarding
critical areas to the department of ecology and the department of fish and
wildlife for review and approval.

Sec. 7. RCW 36.70A.172 and 1995
c 347 s 105 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) In designating and
protecting critical areas under this chapter, counties and cities shall include
the best available science in developing policies and development regulations
to protect the functions and values of critical areas. In addition, counties
and cities shall give special consideration to conservation or protection
measures necessary to preserve or enhance anadromous fisheries.

(2) In reviewing
development regulations to protect critical areas, the department of ecology
and the department of fish and wildlife shall consider and shall make findings
regarding whether counties and cities have included the best available science
in their decisions related to policies and regulations to protect the functions
and values of critical areas.

(3) If it
determines that advice from scientific or other experts is necessary or will be
of substantial assistance in reaching its decision, a growth management hearings
board may retain scientific or other expert advice to assist in reviewing a
petition under RCW 36.70A.290 that involves critical areas.

Sec. 8. RCW 36.70A.480 and 1995
c 347 s 104 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) For shorelines of
the state, the goals and policies of the shoreline management act as set forth
in RCW 90.58.020 are added as one of the goals of this chapter as set forth in
RCW 36.70A.020. The goals and policies of a shoreline master program for a county
or city approved under chapter 90.58 RCW shall be considered an element of the
county or city's comprehensive plan. Shorelines of the state are critical
areas as defined in this chapter and shall be included in development
regulations to protect critical areas adopted according to this chapter.
All other portions of the shoreline master program for a county or city adopted
under chapter 90.58 RCW, including use regulations, shall be considered a part
of the county or city's development regulations.

(2) The shoreline
master program shall be adopted pursuant to the procedures of chapter 90.58 RCW
rather than the procedures set forth in this chapter for the adoption of a
comprehensive plan or development regulations.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
9. A new section is added
to chapter 77.12 RCW to read as follows:

In addition to other
authority conferred in this title, the department is authorized and required to
review and approve development regulations to protect critical areas adopted
according to chapter 36.70A RCW. Development regulations to protect critical areas
adopted according to chapter 36.70A RCW shall take effect when and in such form
as approved or adopted by the department pursuant to section 5 of this act.

Sec. 10. RCW 90.58.030 and 1996 c
265 s 1 are each amended to read as follows:

As used in this
chapter, unless the context otherwise requires, the following definitions and
concepts apply:

(1) Administration:

(a)
"Department" means the department of ecology;

(b)
"Director" means the director of the department of ecology;

(c) "Local
government" means any county, incorporated city, or town which contains
within its boundaries any lands or waters subject to this chapter;

(d) "Person"
means an individual, partnership, corporation, association, organization,
cooperative, public or municipal corporation, or agency of the state or local
governmental unit however designated;

(e) "Hearing
board" means the shoreline hearings board established by this chapter.

(2) Geographical:

(a) "Extreme low
tide" means the lowest line on the land reached by a receding tide;

(b) "Ordinary high
water mark" on all lakes, streams, and tidal water is that mark that will
be found by examining the bed and banks and ascertaining where the presence and
action of waters are so common and usual, and so long continued in all ordinary
years, as to mark upon the soil a character distinct from that of the abutting
upland, in respect to vegetation as that condition exists on June 1, 1971, as
it may naturally change thereafter, or as it may change thereafter in
accordance with permits issued by a local government or the department:
PROVIDED, That in any area where the ordinary high water mark cannot be found,
the ordinary high water mark adjoining salt water shall be the line of mean
higher high tide and the ordinary high water mark adjoining fresh water shall
be the line of mean high water;

(c) "Shorelines of
the state" are the total of all "shorelines" and
"shorelines of statewide significance" within the state;

(d)
"Shorelines" means all of the water areas of the state, including
reservoirs, and their associated shorelands, together with the lands underlying
them; except (i) shorelines of statewide significance; (ii) shorelines on
segments of streams upstream of a point where the mean annual flow is twenty
cubic feet per second or less and the wetlands associated with such upstream
segments; and (iii) shorelines on lakes less than twenty acres in size and
wetlands associated with such small lakes;

(e) "Shorelines of
statewide significance" means the following shorelines of the state:

(i) The area between
the ordinary high water mark and the western boundary of the state from Cape
Disappointment on the south to Cape Flattery on the north, including harbors,
bays, estuaries, and inlets;

(ii) Those areas of
Puget Sound and adjacent salt waters and the Strait of Juan de Fuca between the
ordinary high water mark and the line of extreme low tide as follows:

(A) Nisqually Delta‑-from
DeWolf Bight to Tatsolo Point,

(B) Birch Bay‑-from
Point Whitehorn to Birch Point,

(C) Hood Canal‑-from
Tala Point to Foulweather Bluff,

(D) Skagit Bay and
adjacent area‑-from Brown Point to Yokeko Point, and

(E) Padilla Bay‑-from
March Point to William Point;

(iii) Those areas of
Puget Sound and the Strait of Juan de Fuca and adjacent salt waters north to
the Canadian line and lying seaward from the line of extreme low tide;

(iv) Those lakes,
whether natural, artificial, or a combination thereof, with a surface acreage
of one thousand acres or more measured at the ordinary high water mark;

(v) Those natural
rivers or segments thereof as follows:

(A) Any west of the
crest of the Cascade range downstream of a point where the mean annual flow is
measured at one thousand cubic feet per second or more,

(B) Any east of the
crest of the Cascade range downstream of a point where the annual flow is
measured at two hundred cubic feet per second or more, or those portions of
rivers east of the crest of the Cascade range downstream from the first three
hundred square miles of drainage area, whichever is longer;

(vi) Those shorelands
associated with (i), (ii), (iv), and (v) of this subsection (2)(e);

(f)
"Shorelands" or "shoreland areas" means those lands
extending landward for two hundred feet in all directions as measured on a
horizontal plane from the ordinary high water mark; floodways and contiguous
floodplain areas landward two hundred feet from such floodways; and all
wetlands and river deltas associated with the streams, lakes, and tidal waters
which are subject to the provisions of this chapter; the same to be designated
as to location by the department of ecology. Any county or city may determine
that portion of a one-hundred-year-flood plain to be included in its master
program as long as such portion includes, as a minimum, the floodway and the
adjacent land extending landward two hundred feet therefrom;

(g)
"Floodway" means those portions of the area of a river valley lying
streamward from the outer limits of a watercourse upon which flood waters are
carried during periods of flooding that occur with reasonable regularity,
although not necessarily annually, said floodway being identified, under normal
condition, by changes in surface soil conditions or changes in types or quality
of vegetative ground cover condition. The floodway shall not include those
lands that can reasonably be expected to be protected from flood waters by
flood control devices maintained by or maintained under license from the
federal government, the state, or a political subdivision of the state;

(h)
"Wetlands" means areas that are inundated or saturated by surface
water or ground water at a frequency and duration sufficient to support, and
that under normal circumstances do support, a prevalence of vegetation
typically adapted for life in saturated soil conditions. Wetlands generally
include swamps, marshes, bogs, and similar areas. Wetlands do not include
those artificial wetlands intentionally created from nonwetland sites,
including, but not limited to, irrigation and drainage ditches, grass-lined
swales, canals, detention facilities, wastewater treatment facilities, farm
ponds, and landscape amenities, or those wetlands created after July 1, 1990,
that were unintentionally created as a result of the construction of a road,
street, or highway. Wetlands may include those artificial wetlands
intentionally created from nonwetland areas to mitigate the conversion of
wetlands.

(3) Procedural terms:

(a)
"Guidelines" means those standards adopted to implement the policy of
this chapter for regulation of use of the shorelines of the state prior to
adoption of master programs. Such standards shall also provide criteria to
local governments and the department in developing master programs and in
designating and protecting critical areas as required by chapter 36.70A RCW;

(b) "Master
program" shall mean the comprehensive use plan for a described area, and
the use regulations together with maps, diagrams, charts, or other descriptive
material and text, a statement of desired goals, and standards developed in
accordance with the policies enunciated in RCW 90.58.020. A master program
includes development regulations to protect critical areas adopted by counties
and cities according to chapter 36.70A RCW;

(c) "State master
program" is the cumulative total of all master programs approved or
adopted by the department of ecology;

(d)
"Development" means a use consisting of the construction or exterior
alteration of structures; dredging; drilling; dumping; filling; removal of any
sand, gravel, or minerals; bulkheading; driving of piling; placing of
obstructions; or any project of a permanent or temporary nature which
interferes with the normal public use of the surface of the waters overlying
lands subject to this chapter at any state of water level;

(e) "Substantial
development" shall mean any development of which the total cost or fair
market value exceeds two thousand five hundred dollars, or any development
which materially interferes with the normal public use of the water or
shorelines of the state; except that the following shall not be considered
substantial developments for the purpose of this chapter:

(i) Normal maintenance
or repair of existing structures or developments, including damage by accident,
fire, or elements;

(ii) Construction of
the normal protective bulkhead common to single family residences;

(iii) Emergency
construction necessary to protect property from damage by the elements;

(iv) Construction and
practices normal or necessary for farming, irrigation, and ranching activities,
including agricultural service roads and utilities on shorelands, and the
construction and maintenance of irrigation structures including but not limited
to head gates, pumping facilities, and irrigation channels. A feedlot of any
size, all processing plants, other activities of a commercial nature,
alteration of the contour of the shorelands by leveling or filling other than
that which results from normal cultivation, shall not be considered normal or
necessary farming or ranching activities. A feedlot shall be an enclosure or
facility used or capable of being used for feeding livestock hay, grain,
silage, or other livestock feed, but shall not include land for growing crops
or vegetation for livestock feeding and/or grazing, nor shall it include normal
livestock wintering operations;

(v) Construction or
modification of navigational aids such as channel markers and anchor buoys;

(vi) Construction on
shorelands by an owner, lessee, or contract purchaser of a single family
residence for his own use or for the use of his family, which residence does
not exceed a height of thirty-five feet above average grade level and which
meets all requirements of the state agency or local government having
jurisdiction thereof, other than requirements imposed pursuant to this chapter;

(vii) Construction of a
dock, including a community dock, designed for pleasure craft only, for the
private noncommercial use of the owner, lessee, or contract purchaser of single
and multiple family residences. This exception applies if either: (A) In salt
waters, the fair market value of the dock does not exceed two thousand five
hundred dollars; or (B) in fresh waters, the fair market value of the dock does
not exceed ten thousand dollars, but if subsequent construction having a fair
market value exceeding two thousand five hundred dollars occurs within five
years of completion of the prior construction, the subsequent construction
shall be considered a substantial development for the purpose of this chapter;

(viii) Operation,
maintenance, or construction of canals, waterways, drains, reservoirs, or other
facilities that now exist or are hereafter created or developed as a part of an
irrigation system for the primary purpose of making use of system waters,
including return flow and artificially stored ground water for the irrigation
of lands;

(ix) The marking of
property lines or corners on state owned lands, when such marking does not
significantly interfere with normal public use of the surface of the water;

(x) Operation and
maintenance of any system of dikes, ditches, drains, or other facilities
existing on September 8, 1975, which were created, developed, or utilized
primarily as a part of an agricultural drainage or diking system;

(xi) Site exploration
and investigation activities that are prerequisite to preparation of an
application for development authorization under this chapter, if:

(A) The activity does
not interfere with the normal public use of the surface waters;

(B) The activity will
have no significant adverse impact on the environment including, but not
limited to, fish, wildlife, fish or wildlife habitat, water quality, and
aesthetic values;

(C) The activity does
not involve the installation of a structure, and upon completion of the
activity the vegetation and land configuration of the site are restored to
conditions existing before the activity;

(D) A private entity
seeking development authorization under this section first posts a performance
bond or provides other evidence of financial responsibility to the local
jurisdiction to ensure that the site is restored to preexisting conditions; and

(E) The activity is not
subject to the permit requirements of RCW 90.58.550;

(xii) The process of
removing or controlling an aquatic noxious weed, as defined in RCW 17.26.020,
through the use of an herbicide or other treatment methods applicable to weed
control that are recommended by a final environmental impact statement
published by the department of agriculture or the department jointly with other
state agencies under chapter 43.21C RCW.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
11. A new section is added
to chapter 90.58 RCW to read as follows:

In addition to the
authority to approve master programs in RCW 90.58.090, the department is
authorized and required to review and approve development regulations to
protect critical areas adopted according to chapter 36.70A RCW. Development
regulations to protect critical areas adopted according to chapter 36.70A RCW
shall take effect when and in such form as approved or adopted by the
department pursuant to section 5 of this act.

Sec. 12. RCW 90.58.100 and 1997 c
369 s 7 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) The master programs
provided for in this chapter, when adopted or approved by the department shall
constitute use regulations for the various shorelines of the state. In
preparing the master programs, and any amendments thereto, the department and
local governments shall to the extent feasible:

(a) Utilize a
systematic interdisciplinary approach which will insure the integrated use of
the natural and social sciences and the environmental design arts;

(b) Consult with and
obtain the comments of any federal, state, regional, or local agency having any
special expertise with respect to any environmental impact;

(c) Consider all plans,
studies, surveys, inventories, and systems of classification made or being made
by federal, state, regional, or local agencies, by private individuals, or by
organizations dealing with pertinent shorelines of the state;

(d) Conduct or support
such further research, studies, surveys, and interviews as are deemed
necessary;

(e) Utilize all
available information regarding hydrology, geography, topography, ecology,
economics, and other pertinent data;

(f) Employ, when
feasible, all appropriate, modern scientific data processing and computer
techniques to store, index, analyze, and manage the information gathered.

(2) The master programs
shall include, when appropriate, the following:

(a) An economic
development element for the location and design of industries, industrial
projects of statewide significance, transportation facilities, port facilities,
tourist facilities, commerce and other developments that are particularly
dependent on their location on or use of the shorelines of the state;

(b) A public access
element making provision for public access to publicly owned areas;

(c) A recreational
element for the preservation and enlargement of recreational opportunities,
including but not limited to parks, tidelands, beaches, and recreational areas;

(d) A circulation
element consisting of the general location and extent of existing and proposed
major thoroughfares, transportation routes, terminals, and other public
utilities and facilities, all correlated with the shoreline use element;

(e) A use element which
considers the proposed general distribution and general location and extent of
the use on shorelines and adjacent land areas for housing, business, industry,
transportation, agriculture, natural resources, recreation, education, public
buildings and grounds, and other categories of public and private uses of the
land;

(f) A conservation
element for the preservation of natural resources, including but not limited to
scenic vistas, aesthetics, and vital estuarine areas for fisheries and wildlife
protection;

(g) An historic,
cultural, scientific, and educational element for the protection and
restoration of buildings, sites, and areas having historic, cultural,
scientific, or educational values;

(h) An element that
gives consideration to the statewide interest in the prevention and
minimization of flood damages; ((and))

(i) Development
regulations to protect critical areas adopted according to chapter 36.70A RCW;
and

(j) Any other
element deemed appropriate or necessary to effectuate the policy of this
chapter.

(3) The master programs
shall include such map or maps, descriptive text, diagrams and charts, or other
descriptive material as are necessary to provide for ease of understanding.

(4) Master programs
will reflect that state-owned shorelines of the state are particularly adapted
to providing wilderness beaches, ecological study areas, and other recreational
activities for the public and will give appropriate special consideration to
same.

(5) Each master program
shall contain provisions to allow for the varying of the application of use
regulations of the program, including provisions for permits for conditional
uses and variances, to insure that strict implementation of a program will not
create unnecessary hardships or thwart the policy enumerated in RCW 90.58.020.
Any such varying shall be allowed only if extraordinary circumstances are shown
and the public interest suffers no substantial detrimental effect. The concept
of this subsection shall be incorporated in the rules adopted by the department
relating to the establishment of a permit system as provided in RCW
90.58.140(3).

(6) Each
master program shall contain standards governing the protection of single
family residences and appurtenant structures against damage or loss due to
shoreline erosion. The standards shall govern the issuance of substantial
development permits for shoreline protection, including structural methods such
as construction of bulkheads, and nonstructural methods of protection. The
standards shall provide for methods which achieve effective and timely
protection against loss or damage to single family residences and appurtenant
structures due to shoreline erosion. The standards shall provide a preference
for permit issuance for measures to protect single family residences occupied
prior to January 1, 1992, where the proposed measure is designed to minimize
harm to the shoreline natural environment.

---
END ---