BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF
WASHINGTON:

PART I‑-GROWTH MANAGEMENT ACT

Sec. 1. RCW 36.70A.020 and 1990
1st ex.s. c 17 s 2 are each amended to read as follows:

The following goals are
adopted to guide the development and adoption of comprehensive plans and
development regulations of those counties and cities that are required or
choose to plan under RCW 36.70A.040. The following goals are not listed in
order of priority and shall be used exclusively for the purpose of guiding the
development of comprehensive plans and development regulations:

(1) Urban growth.
Encourage development in urban areas where adequate public facilities and
services exist or can be provided in an efficient manner.

(2) Reduce sprawl.
Reduce the inappropriate conversion of undeveloped land into sprawling,
low-density development.

(3) Transportation.
Encourage efficient multimodal transportation systems that are based on
regional priorities and coordinated with county and city comprehensive plans.

(4) Housing. Encourage
the availability of affordable housing to all economic segments of the
population of this state, promote a variety of residential densities and
housing types, and encourage preservation of existing housing stock.

(5) Economic
development. Encourage economic development throughout the state that is
consistent with adopted comprehensive plans, promote economic opportunity for
all citizens of this state, especially for unemployed and for disadvantaged
persons, and encourage growth in areas experiencing insufficient economic
growth, all within the capacities of the state's natural resources, public
services, and public facilities.

(6) Property rights.
Private property shall not be taken for public use without just compensation
having been made. The property rights of landowners shall be protected from
arbitrary and discriminatory actions.

(7) Permits.
Applications for both state and local government permits should be processed in
a timely and fair manner to ensure predictability.

(8) Natural resource
industries. Maintain and enhance natural resource-based industries, including
productive timber, agricultural, and fisheries industries. Encourage the
conservation of productive forest lands and productive agricultural lands, and
discourage incompatible uses.

(9) Open space and
recreation. Encourage the retention of open space and development of
recreational opportunities, conserve fish and wildlife habitat, increase access
to natural resource lands and water, and develop parks.

(10) Environment.
Protect the environment and enhance the state's high quality of life, including
air and water quality, and the availability of water.

(11) Citizen
participation and coordination. Encourage the involvement of citizens in the
planning process and ensure coordination between communities and jurisdictions
to reconcile conflicts.

(12) Public facilities
and services. Ensure that those public facilities and services necessary to
support development shall be adequate to serve the development at the time the
development is available for occupancy and use without decreasing current
service levels below locally established minimum standards.

(13) Historic
preservation. Identify and encourage the preservation of lands, sites, and
structures, that have historical or archaeological significance.

(14) Shoreline use.
Manage shorelines of the state to foster all reasonable and appropriate uses
while promoting and enhancing the public interest according to the policy of
RCW 90.58.020.

Sec. 2. RCW 36.70A.030 and 1997
c 429 s 3 are each amended to read as follows:

Unless the context
clearly requires otherwise, the definitions in this section apply throughout
this chapter.

(1) "Adopt a
comprehensive land use plan" means to enact a new comprehensive land use
plan or to update an existing comprehensive land use plan.

(2) "Agricultural
land" means land primarily devoted to the commercial production of
horticultural, viticultural, floricultural, dairy, apiary, vegetable, or animal
products or of berries, grain, hay, straw, turf, seed, Christmas trees not
subject to the excise tax imposed by RCW 84.33.100 through 84.33.140, finfish
in upland hatcheries, or livestock, and that has long-term commercial
significance for agricultural production.

(3) "City"
means any city or town, including a code city.

(4) "Comprehensive
land use plan," "comprehensive plan," or "plan" means
a generalized coordinated land use policy statement of the governing body of a
county or city that is adopted pursuant to this chapter.

(5) "Critical
areas" include the following areas and ecosystems: (a) Wetlands; (b)
areas with a critical recharging effect on aquifers used for potable water; (c)
fish and wildlife habitat conservation areas; (d) frequently flooded areas; and
(e) geologically hazardous areas.

(6)
"Department" means the department of community, trade, and economic
development.

(7) "Development
regulations" or "regulation" means the controls placed on
development or land use activities by a county or city, including, but not
limited to, zoning ordinances, critical areas ordinances, shoreline master
programs, official controls, planned unit development ordinances, subdivision
ordinances, and binding site plan ordinances together with any amendments
thereto. "Development regulations" or "regulation"
specifically includes the use regulations included in a master program adopted
pursuant to chapter 90.58 RCW. A development regulation does not include a
decision to approve a project permit application, as defined in RCW 36.70B.020,
even though the decision may be expressed in a resolution or ordinance of the
legislative body of the county or city.

(8) "Forest
land" means land primarily devoted to growing trees for long-term
commercial timber production on land that can be economically and practically
managed for such production, including Christmas trees subject to the excise
tax imposed under RCW 84.33.100 through 84.33.140, and that has long-term
commercial significance. In determining whether forest land is primarily
devoted to growing trees for long-term commercial timber production on land
that can be economically and practically managed for such production, the
following factors shall be considered: (a) The proximity of the land to urban,
suburban, and rural settlements; (b) surrounding parcel size and the
compatibility and intensity of adjacent and nearby land uses; (c) long-term
local economic conditions that affect the ability to manage for timber
production; and (d) the availability of public facilities and services conducive
to conversion of forest land to other uses.

(9) "Geologically
hazardous areas" means areas that because of their susceptibility to
erosion, sliding, earthquake, or other geological events, are not suited to the
siting of commercial, residential, or industrial development consistent with
public health or safety concerns.

(10) "Long-term
commercial significance" includes the growing capacity, productivity, and
soil composition of the land for long-term commercial production, in
consideration with the land's proximity to population areas, and the
possibility of more intense uses of the land.

(11) "Master
program" has the same meaning as in RCW 90.58.030.

(12)
"Minerals" include gravel, sand, and valuable metallic substances.

(((12))) (13)
"Public facilities" include streets, roads, highways, sidewalks,
street and road lighting systems, traffic signals, domestic water systems,
storm and sanitary sewer systems, parks and recreational facilities, and
schools.

(((13))) (14)
"Public services" include fire protection and suppression, law
enforcement, public health, education, recreation, environmental protection,
and other governmental services.

(((14))) (15)
"Rural character" refers to the patterns of land use and development
established by a county in the rural element of its comprehensive plan:

(a) In which open
space, the natural landscape, and vegetation predominate over the built
environment;

(b) That foster
traditional rural lifestyles, rural-based economies, and opportunities to both
live and work in rural areas;

(c) That provide visual
landscapes that are traditionally found in rural areas and communities;

(d) That are compatible
with the use of the land by wildlife and for fish and wildlife habitat;

(e) That reduce the
inappropriate conversion of undeveloped land into sprawling, low‑density
development;

(f) That generally do
not require the extension of urban governmental services; and

(g) That are consistent
with the protection of natural surface water flows and ground water and surface
water recharge and discharge areas.

(((15))) (16)
"Rural development" refers to development outside the urban growth
area and outside agricultural, forest, and mineral resource lands designated
pursuant to RCW 36.70A.170. Rural development can consist of a variety of uses
and residential densities, including clustered residential development, at
levels that are consistent with the preservation of rural character and the
requirements of the rural element. Rural development does not refer to
agriculture or forestry activities that may be conducted in rural areas.

(((16))) (17)
"Rural governmental services" or "rural services" include
those public services and public facilities historically and typically
delivered at an intensity usually found in rural areas, and may include
domestic water systems, fire and police protection services, transportation and
public transit services, and other public utilities associated with rural
development and normally not associated with urban areas. Rural services do
not include storm or sanitary sewers, except as otherwise authorized by RCW
36.70A.110(4).

(((17))) (18)
"Shorelines of the state," "shorelines," and
"shorelines of statewide significance" have the same meaning as in
RCW 90.58.030.

(19) "Urban
growth" refers to growth that makes intensive use of land for the location
of buildings, structures, and impermeable surfaces to such a degree as to be
incompatible with the primary use of land for the production of food, other
agricultural products, or fiber, or the extraction of mineral resources, rural
uses, rural development, and natural resource lands designated pursuant to RCW
36.70A.170. A pattern of more intensive rural development, as provided in RCW
36.70A.070(5)(d), is not urban growth. When allowed to spread over wide areas,
urban growth typically requires urban governmental services.
"Characterized by urban growth" refers to land having urban growth
located on it, or to land located in relationship to an area with urban growth
on it as to be appropriate for urban growth.

(((18))) (20)
"Urban growth areas" means those areas designated by a county
pursuant to RCW 36.70A.110.

(((19))) (21)
"Urban governmental services" or "urban services" include
those public services and public facilities at an intensity historically and
typically provided in cities, specifically including storm and sanitary sewer
systems, domestic water systems, street cleaning services, fire and police
protection services, public transit services, and other public utilities
associated with urban areas and normally not associated with rural areas.

(((20))) (22)
"Wetland" or "wetlands" ((means areas that are inundated
or saturated by surface water or ground water at a frequency and duration
sufficient to support, and that under normal circumstances do support, a
prevalence of vegetation typically adapted for life in saturated soil
conditions. Wetlands generally include swamps, marshes, bogs, and similar areas.
Wetlands do not include those artificial wetlands intentionally created from
nonwetland sites, including, but not limited to, irrigation and drainage
ditches, grass-lined swales, canals, detention facilities, wastewater treatment
facilities, farm ponds, and landscape amenities, or those wetlands created
after July 1, 1990, that were unintentionally created as a result of the
construction of a road, street, or highway. Wetlands may include those
artificial wetlands intentionally created from nonwetland areas created to
mitigate conversion of wetlands)) has the same meaning as
"wetlands" in RCW 90.58.030.

Sec. 3. RCW 36.70A.035 and 1999
c 315 s 708 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) The public
participation requirements of this chapter shall include notice procedures that
are reasonably calculated to provide notice to property owners and other
affected and interested individuals, tribes, government agencies, businesses,
school districts, and organizations of proposed amendments to comprehensive
plans and development regulation. Examples of reasonable notice provisions
include:

(a) Posting the
property for site-specific proposals;

(b) Publishing notice
in a newspaper of general circulation in the county, city, or general area
where the proposal is located or that will be affected by the proposal;

(c) Notifying public or
private groups with known interest in a certain proposal or in the type of
proposal being considered;

(d) Placing notices in
appropriate regional, neighborhood, ethnic, or trade journals; and

(e) Publishing notice
in agency newsletters or sending notice to agency mailing lists, including
general lists or lists for specific proposals or subject areas.

(2) The public
participation process established by local governments to satisfy the
requirements of this chapter shall include measures to satisfy the requirements
of RCW 90.58.130 for the shoreline master program developed as the shoreline
element of the comprehensive plan and as development regulations pursuant to
this chapter and chapter 90.58 RCW.

(3)(a) Except as
otherwise provided in (b) of this subsection, if the legislative body for a
county or city chooses to consider a change to an amendment to a comprehensive
plan or development regulation, and the change is proposed after the
opportunity for review and comment has passed under the county's or city's
procedures, an opportunity for review and comment on the proposed change shall
be provided before the local legislative body votes on the proposed change.

(b) An additional
opportunity for public review and comment is not required under (a) of this
subsection if:

(i) An environmental
impact statement has been prepared under chapter 43.21C RCW for the pending
resolution or ordinance and the proposed change is within the range of
alternatives considered in the environmental impact statement;

(ii) The proposed
change is within the scope of the alternatives available for public comment;

(iii) The proposed
change only corrects typographical errors, corrects cross-references, makes
address or name changes, or clarifies language of a proposed ordinance or
resolution without changing its effect;

(iv) The proposed
change is to a resolution or ordinance making a capital budget decision as
provided in RCW 36.70A.120; or

(v) The proposed change
is to a resolution or ordinance enacting a moratorium or interim control
adopted under RCW 36.70A.390.

(((3))) (4)
This section is prospective in effect and does not apply to a comprehensive
plan, development regulation, or amendment adopted before July 27, 1997.

Sec. 4. RCW 36.70A.045 and 1991
sp.s. c 32 s 15 are each amended to read as follows:

The department may
adopt a schedule to permit phasing of comprehensive plan submittal for counties
and cities planning under RCW 36.70A.040. This schedule shall not permit a
comprehensive plan to be submitted greater than one hundred eighty days past
the date that the plan was required to be submitted and shall be used to
facilitate expeditious review and interjurisdictional coordination of
comprehensive plans and development regulations. The schedule adopted by
the department shall be consistent with any extensions for submittal of
shoreline master programs authorized by the department of ecology according to
RCW 90.58.080.

Sec. 5. RCW 36.70A.070 and 1998
c 171 s 2 are each amended to read as follows:

The comprehensive plan
of a county or city that is required or chooses to plan under RCW 36.70A.040
shall consist of a map or maps, and descriptive text covering objectives,
principles, and standards used to develop the comprehensive plan. The plan
shall be an internally consistent document, and all elements shall be
consistent with the future land use map. A comprehensive plan shall be adopted
and amended with public participation as provided in RCW 36.70A.140 and
90.58.030.

Each comprehensive plan
shall include a plan, scheme, or design for each of the following:

(1) A land use element
designating the proposed general distribution and general location and extent
of the uses of land, where appropriate, for agriculture, timber production,
housing, commerce, industry, recreation, open spaces, general aviation
airports, public utilities, public facilities, and other land uses. The land
use element shall include population densities, building intensities, and
estimates of future population growth. The land use element shall provide for
protection of the quality and quantity of ground water used for public water
supplies. Where applicable, the land use element shall review drainage,
flooding, and storm water run-off in the area and nearby jurisdictions and
provide guidance for corrective actions to mitigate or cleanse those discharges
that pollute waters of the state, including Puget Sound or waters entering
Puget Sound.

(2) A housing element
ensuring the vitality and character of established residential neighborhoods
that: (a) Includes an inventory and analysis of existing and projected housing
needs; (b) includes a statement of goals, policies, objectives, and mandatory
provisions for the preservation, improvement, and development of housing,
including single-family residences; (c) identifies sufficient land for housing,
including, but not limited to, government-assisted housing, housing for
low-income families, manufactured housing, multifamily housing, and group homes
and foster care facilities; and (d) makes adequate provisions for existing and
projected needs of all economic segments of the community.

(3) A capital
facilities plan element consisting of: (a) An inventory of existing capital
facilities owned by public entities, showing the locations and capacities of
the capital facilities; (b) a forecast of the future needs for such capital
facilities; (c) the proposed locations and capacities of expanded or new
capital facilities; (d) at least a six-year plan that will finance such capital
facilities within projected funding capacities and clearly identifies sources
of public money for such purposes; and (e) a requirement to reassess the land
use element if probable funding falls short of meeting existing needs and to
ensure that the land use element, capital facilities plan element, and
financing plan within the capital facilities plan element are coordinated and
consistent.

(4) A utilities element
consisting of the general location, proposed location, and capacity of all
existing and proposed utilities, including, but not limited to, electrical
lines, telecommunication lines, and natural gas lines.

(5) Rural element.
Counties shall include a rural element including lands that are not designated
for urban growth, agriculture, forest, or mineral resources. The following
provisions shall apply to the rural element:

(a) Growth management
act goals and local circumstances. Because circumstances vary from county to
county, in establishing patterns of rural densities and uses, a county may
consider local circumstances, but shall develop a written record explaining how
the rural element harmonizes the planning goals in RCW 36.70A.020 and meets the
requirements of this chapter.

(b) Rural development.
The rural element shall permit rural development, forestry, and agriculture in
rural areas. The rural element shall provide for a variety of rural densities,
uses, essential public facilities, and rural governmental services needed to
serve the permitted densities and uses. In order to achieve a variety of rural
densities and uses, counties may provide for clustering, density transfer,
design guidelines, conservation easements, and other innovative techniques that
will accommodate appropriate rural densities and uses that are not
characterized by urban growth and that are consistent with rural character.

(c) Measures governing
rural development. The rural element shall include measures that apply to
rural development and protect the rural character of the area, as established
by the county, by:

(i) Containing or
otherwise controlling rural development;

(ii) Assuring visual
compatibility of rural development with the surrounding rural area;

(iii) Reducing the
inappropriate conversion of undeveloped land into sprawling, low-density
development in the rural area;

(iv) Protecting
critical areas, as provided in RCW 36.70A.060, and surface water and ground
water resources; and

(v) Protecting against
conflicts with the use of agricultural, forest, and mineral resource lands
designated under RCW 36.70A.170.

(d) Limited areas of
more intensive rural development. Subject to the requirements of this
subsection and except as otherwise specifically provided in this subsection
(5)(d), the rural element may allow for limited areas of more intensive rural
development, including necessary public facilities and public services to serve
the limited area as follows:

(i) Rural development
consisting of the infill, development, or redevelopment of existing commercial,
industrial, residential, or mixed-use areas, whether characterized as shoreline
development, villages, hamlets, rural activity centers, or crossroads
developments. A commercial, industrial, residential, shoreline, or mixed-use
area shall be subject to the requirements of (d)(iv) of this subsection, but
shall not be subject to the requirements of (c)(ii) and (iii) of this
subsection. An industrial area is not required to be principally designed to
serve the existing and projected rural population;

(ii) The
intensification of development on lots containing, or new development of,
small-scale recreational or tourist uses, including commercial facilities to
serve those recreational or tourist uses, that rely on a rural location and
setting, but that do not include new residential development. A small-scale recreation
or tourist use is not required to be principally designed to serve the existing
and projected rural population. Public services and public facilities shall be
limited to those necessary to serve the recreation or tourist use and shall be
provided in a manner that does not permit low-density sprawl;

(iii) The
intensification of development on lots containing isolated nonresidential uses
or new development of isolated cottage industries and isolated small-scale
businesses that are not principally designed to serve the existing and
projected rural population and nonresidential uses, but do provide job
opportunities for rural residents. Public services and public facilities shall
be limited to those necessary to serve the isolated nonresidential use and
shall be provided in a manner that does not permit low-density sprawl;

(iv) A county shall
adopt measures to minimize and contain the existing areas or uses of more
intensive rural development, as appropriate, authorized under this subsection.
Lands included in such existing areas or uses shall not extend beyond the
logical outer boundary of the existing area or use, thereby allowing a new
pattern of low-density sprawl. Existing areas are those that are clearly
identifiable and contained and where there is a logical boundary delineated
predominately by the built environment, but that may also include undeveloped
lands if limited as provided in this subsection. The county shall establish
the logical outer boundary of an area of more intensive rural development. In
establishing the logical outer boundary the county shall address (A) the need
to preserve the character of existing natural neighborhoods and communities,
(B) physical boundaries such as bodies of water, streets and highways, and land
forms and contours, (C) the prevention of abnormally irregular boundaries, and
(D) the ability to provide public facilities and public services in a manner
that does not permit low-density sprawl;

(v) For purposes of (d)
of this subsection, an existing area or existing use is one that was in
existence:

(A) On July 1, 1990, in
a county that was initially required to plan under all of the provisions of
this chapter;

(B) On the date the
county adopted a resolution under RCW 36.70A.040(2), in a county that is planning
under all of the provisions of this chapter under RCW 36.70A.040(2); or

(C) On the date the
office of financial management certifies the county's population as provided in
RCW 36.70A.040(5), in a county that is planning under all of the provisions of
this chapter pursuant to RCW 36.70A.040(5).

(e) Exception. This
subsection shall not be interpreted to permit in the rural area a major
industrial development or a master planned resort unless otherwise specifically
permitted under RCW 36.70A.360 and 36.70A.365.

(6) A transportation
element that implements, and is consistent with, the land use element.

(a) The transportation
element shall include the following subelements:

(i) Land use
assumptions used in estimating travel;

(ii) Estimated traffic
impacts to state-owned transportation facilities resulting from land use
assumptions to assist the department of transportation in monitoring the
performance of state facilities, to plan improvements for the facilities, and
to assess the impact of land-use decisions on state-owned transportation
facilities;

(iii) Facilities and
services needs, including:

(A) An inventory of
air, water, and ground transportation facilities and services, including
transit alignments and general aviation airport facilities, to define existing
capital facilities and travel levels as a basis for future planning. This
inventory must include state-owned transportation facilities within the city or
county's jurisdiction boundaries;

(B) Level of service
standards for all locally owned arterials and transit routes to serve as a
gauge to judge performance of the system. These standards should be regionally
coordinated;

(C) For state-owned
transportation facilities, level of service standards for highways, as
prescribed in chapters 47.06 and 47.80 RCW, to gauge the performance of the
system. The purposes of reflecting level of service standards for state
highways in the local comprehensive plan are to monitor the performance of the
system, to evaluate improvement strategies, and to facilitate coordination
between the county's or city's six-year street, road, or transit program and
the department of transportation's six-year investment program. The
concurrency requirements of (b) of this subsection do not apply to
transportation facilities and services of statewide significance except for
counties consisting of islands whose only connection to the mainland are state
highways or ferry routes. In these island counties, state highways and ferry
route capacity must be a factor in meeting the concurrency requirements in (b)
of this subsection;

(D) Specific actions
and requirements for bringing into compliance locally owned transportation
facilities or services that are below an established level of service standard;

(E) Forecasts of
traffic for at least ten years based on the adopted land use plan to provide
information on the location, timing, and capacity needs of future growth;

(F) Identification of
state and local system needs to meet current and future demands. Identified
needs on state-owned transportation facilities must be consistent with the
statewide multimodal transportation plan required under chapter 47.06 RCW;

(iv) Finance,
including:

(A) An analysis of
funding capability to judge needs against probable funding resources;

(B) A multiyear
financing plan based on the needs identified in the comprehensive plan, the
appropriate parts of which shall serve as the basis for the six-year street,
road, or transit program required by RCW 35.77.010 for cities, RCW 36.81.121
for counties, and RCW 35.58.2795 for public transportation systems. The
multiyear financing plan should be coordinated with the six-year improvement
program developed by the department of transportation as required by RCW
47.05.030;

(C) If probable funding
falls short of meeting identified needs, a discussion of how additional funding
will be raised, or how land use assumptions will be reassessed to ensure that
level of service standards will be met;

(v) Intergovernmental
coordination efforts, including an assessment of the impacts of the
transportation plan and land use assumptions on the transportation systems of
adjacent jurisdictions;

(vi) Demand-management
strategies.

(b) After adoption of
the comprehensive plan by jurisdictions required to plan or who choose to plan
under RCW 36.70A.040, local jurisdictions must adopt and enforce ordinances
which prohibit development approval if the development causes the level of
service on a locally owned transportation facility to decline below the
standards adopted in the transportation element of the comprehensive plan,
unless transportation improvements or strategies to accommodate the impacts of
development are made concurrent with the development. These strategies may
include increased public transportation service, ride sharing programs, demand
management, and other transportation systems management strategies. For the
purposes of this subsection (6) "concurrent with the development"
shall mean that improvements or strategies are in place at the time of
development, or that a financial commitment is in place to complete the
improvements or strategies within six years.

(c) The transportation
element described in this subsection (6), and the six-year plans required by
RCW 35.77.010 for cities, RCW 36.81.121 for counties, RCW 35.58.2795 for public
transportation systems, and RCW 47.05.030 for the state, must be consistent.

(7) A shoreline
element consisting of the goals and policies of the local shoreline master
program adopted under chapter 90.58 RCW.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
6. A new section is added
to chapter 36.70A RCW to read as follows:

Not later than December
1, 2001, each local government planning under RCW 36.70A.040 shall establish by
ordinance or resolution an integrated and consolidated planning process for the
development and adoption of comprehensive plans and development regulations
under this chapter and shoreline master programs under chapter 90.58 RCW. The
process shall include the following elements:

(1) Coordination of the
planning process to satisfy the requirements of this chapter and chapter 90.58
RCW;

(2) Development of a
public participation program to satisfy the requirements of this chapter and
chapter 90.58 RCW;

(3) Review of
scientific and other information to satisfy the requirements of this chapter
and chapter 90.58 RCW;

(4) Opportunity for
review and consideration of comment from agencies and other interested parties
as required by this chapter and chapter 90.58 RCW;

(5) Consolidation of
public hearing and comment processes to satisfy the requirements of this
chapter and chapter 90.58 RCW;

(6) Timing of submittal
of master program elements to the department of ecology to allow sufficient
time for review and approval by the department of ecology and to adhere to the
schedule for review, revision, and adoption of comprehensive plans and
development regulations specified in RCW 36.70A.130(2);

(7) Consolidation of
amendment and adoption procedures and processes to satisfy the requirements of
this chapter and chapter 90.58 RCW; and

(8) Any other
provisions not inconsistent with the requirements of this chapter, chapter
43.21C RCW, or chapter 90.58 RCW.

Sec. 7. RCW 36.70A.110 and 1997
c 429 s 24 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) Each county that is
required or chooses to plan under RCW 36.70A.040 shall designate an urban
growth area or areas within which urban growth shall be encouraged and outside
of which growth can occur only if it is not urban in nature. Each city that is
located in such a county shall be included within an urban growth area. An
urban growth area may include more than a single city. An urban growth area
may include territory that is located outside of a city only if such territory
already is characterized by urban growth whether or not the urban growth area
includes a city, or is adjacent to territory already characterized by urban
growth, or is a designated new fully contained community as defined by RCW
36.70A.350.

(2) Based upon the
growth management population projection made for the county by the office of
financial management, the county and each city within the county shall include
areas and densities sufficient to permit the urban growth that is projected to
occur in the county or city for the succeeding twenty-year period. Each urban
growth area shall permit urban densities and shall include greenbelt and open
space areas. An urban growth area determination may include a reasonable land
market supply factor and shall permit a range of urban densities and uses. In
determining this market factor, cities and counties may consider local
circumstances. Cities and counties have discretion in their comprehensive
plans to make many choices about accommodating growth.

((Within one year of
July 1, 1990,)) Each county ((that as of June 1, 1991, was
required or chose to plan)) planning under RCW 36.70A.040((,))
shall begin consulting with each city located within its boundaries and each
city shall propose the location of an urban growth area((.)) within
sixty days of the date the county legislative authority of a county adopts its
resolution of intention or of certification by the office of financial
management((, all other counties that are required or choose to plan under
RCW 36.70A.040 shall begin this consultation with each city located within its
boundaries)). The county shall attempt to reach agreement with each city
on the location of an urban growth area within which the city is located. If
such an agreement is not reached with each city located within the urban growth
area, the county shall justify in writing why it so designated the area an
urban growth area. A city may object formally with the department over the
designation of the urban growth area within which it is located. Where
appropriate, the department shall attempt to resolve the conflicts, including
the use of mediation services.

(3) Urban growth should
be located first in areas already characterized by urban growth that have
adequate existing public facility and service capacities to serve such
development, second in areas already characterized by urban growth that will be
served adequately by a combination of both existing public facilities and
services and any additional needed public facilities and services that are
provided by either public or private sources, and third in the remaining
portions of the urban growth areas. Urban growth may also be located in
designated new fully contained communities as defined by RCW 36.70A.350.

(4) In general, cities
are the units of local government most appropriate to provide urban
governmental services. In general, it is not appropriate that urban
governmental services be extended to or expanded in rural areas except in those
limited circumstances shown to be necessary to protect basic public health and
safety and the environment and when such services are financially supportable
at rural densities and do not permit urban development.

(5) ((On or before
October 1, 1993,)) Each county ((that was initially required to
plan)) planning under RCW 36.70A.040(((1))) shall adopt
development regulations designating interim urban growth areas under this chapter((.))
within three years and three months of the date the county legislative
authority of a county adopts its resolution of intention or of certification by
the office of financial management((, all other counties that are required
or choose to plan under RCW 36.70A.040 shall adopt development regulations
designating interim urban growth areas under this chapter)). Adoption of
the interim urban growth areas may only occur after public notice; public
hearing; and compliance with the state environmental policy act, chapter 43.21C
RCW, and RCW 36.70A.110. Such action may be appealed to the appropriate growth
management hearings board under RCW 36.70A.280. Final urban growth areas shall
be adopted at the time of comprehensive plan adoption under this chapter.

(6) Each county shall
include designations of urban growth areas in its comprehensive plan.

Sec. 8. RCW 36.70A.130 and 1997
c 429 s 10 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) Each comprehensive
land use plan and development regulations shall be subject to continuing review
and evaluation by the county or city that adopted them. ((Not later than
September 1, 2002, and at least every five years thereafter,)) A
county or city shall take action to review and, if needed, revise its
comprehensive land use plan and development regulations to ensure that the plan
and regulations are complying with the requirements of this chapter and
chapter 90.58 RCW relating to master programs according to the schedule
specified in subsection (2) of this section.

(2) A county or
city planning under RCW 36.70A.040 shall take action to formally review and, if
needed, revise its comprehensive land use plan and development regulations
according to the following schedule to ensure that the plan and regulations
comply with the requirements of this chapter:

(a) Not later than
September 1, 2005, and every five years thereafter, for a county or city
subject to the requirements of RCW 36.70A.215;

(b) Not later than
September 1, 2006, and every ten years thereafter, for a county or city not
subject to the requirements of RCW 36.70A.215 that adopted its comprehensive
plan according to this chapter between January 1, 1992, and January 1, 1997;
and

(c) Not later than
September 1, 2007, and every ten years thereafter, for a county or city not
subject to the requirements of RCW 36.70A.215 that adopted its comprehensive
plan according to this chapter after January 1, 1997.

(3) A county or city
that becomes required or chooses to plan under RCW 36.70A.040 after July 1,
2001, shall take action to formally review and, if needed, revise its
comprehensive plan and development regulations no later than:

(a) According to the
schedule in subsection (2)(a) of this section for a county or city subject to
the requirements of RCW 36.70A.215; or

(b) Ten years after
the date it was required to adopt its initial comprehensive plan and
development regulations according to this chapter for a county or city not
subject to RCW 36.70A.215 and every ten years thereafter.

(4) Not later than
September 1, 2007, and every ten years thereafter, a county or city not
planning under RCW 36.70A.040 shall review and, if needed, revise its policies
and regulations regarding critical areas and natural resource lands to ensure
that these policies and regulations comply with this chapter.

(5) The formal
review and evaluation required by ((this)) subsection (2) of this
section may be combined with the review required by subsection (((3)))
(8) of this section.

(6) Any
amendment or revision to a comprehensive land use plan shall conform to this
chapter and chapter 90.58 RCW as it relates to shorelines of the state,
and any change to development regulations shall be consistent with and
implement the comprehensive plan.

(((2))) (7)(a)
Each county and city shall establish and broadly disseminate to the public a
public participation program ((identifying)) according to RCW
36.70A.140 and 90.58.130 to identify procedures whereby proposed amendments
or revisions of the comprehensive plan are considered by the governing body of
the county or city no more frequently than once every year ((except that)).
Amendments may be considered more frequently than once every year
under the following circumstances:

(i) The initial
adoption of a subarea plan;

(ii) The adoption or
amendment of a shoreline master program under the procedures set forth in
chapter 90.58 RCW; and

(iii) The amendment of
the capital facilities element of a comprehensive plan that occurs concurrently
with the adoption or amendment of a county or city budget.

(b) Except as otherwise
provided in (a) of this subsection, all proposals shall be considered by the
governing body concurrently so the cumulative effect of the various proposals
can be ascertained. However, after appropriate public participation a county
or city may adopt amendments or revisions to its comprehensive plan that
conform with this chapter whenever an emergency exists or to resolve an appeal
of a comprehensive plan filed with a growth management hearings board or with the
court.

(((3))) (8)
Each county that designates urban growth areas under RCW 36.70A.110 shall
review, at least every ten years, its designated urban growth area or areas,
and the densities permitted within both the incorporated and unincorporated
portions of each urban growth area. The department may authorize extension
of the deadline for the review required by this section to coordinate this
review with the schedule specified in subsections (2), (3), and (4) of this
section. In conjunction with this review by the county, each city located
within an urban growth area shall review the densities permitted within its
boundaries, and the extent to which the urban growth occurring within the
county has located within each city and the unincorporated portions of the
urban growth areas. The county comprehensive plan designating urban growth
areas, and the densities permitted in the urban growth areas by the
comprehensive plans of the county and each city located within the urban growth
areas, shall be revised to accommodate the urban growth projected to occur in
the county for the succeeding twenty-year period. The review required by this
subsection may be combined with the review and evaluation required by RCW
36.70A.215.

Sec. 9. RCW 36.70A.140 and 1995
c 347 s 107 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) Each county
and city ((that is required or chooses to plan)) planning under
RCW 36.70A.040 shall establish and broadly disseminate to the public a public
participation program identifying procedures providing for early and continuous
public participation in the development and amendment of comprehensive land use
plans and development regulations implementing such plans. The procedures
shall provide for broad dissemination of proposals and alternatives,
opportunity for written comments, public meetings after effective notice,
provision for open discussion, communication programs, information services,
and consideration of and response to public comments. In enacting legislation in
response to the board's decision pursuant to RCW 36.70A.300 declaring part or
all of a comprehensive plan or development regulation invalid, the county or
city shall provide for public participation that is appropriate and effective
under the circumstances presented by the board's order. Errors in exact
compliance with the established program and procedures shall not render the
comprehensive land use plan or development regulations invalid if the spirit of
the program and procedures is observed.

(2) In addition to
meeting the requirements of this section, the public participation program
related to development and amendment of the shoreline master program
constituting both the shoreline element of the comprehensive plan and
development regulations implementing the shoreline element shall satisfy the
requirements of RCW 90.58.100 and 90.58.130.

Sec. 10. RCW 36.70A.210 and 1998
c 171 s 4 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) The legislature
recognizes that counties are regional governments within their boundaries, and
cities are primary providers of urban governmental services within urban growth
areas. For the purposes of this section, a "countywide planning policy"
is a written policy statement or statements used solely for establishing a
countywide framework from which county and city comprehensive plans are
developed and adopted pursuant to this chapter. This framework shall ensure
that city and county comprehensive plans are consistent as required in RCW
36.70A.100. Nothing in this section shall be construed to alter the land-use
powers of cities.

(2) The legislative
authority of a county that plans under RCW 36.70A.040 shall adopt a countywide
planning policy in cooperation with the cities located in whole or in part
within the county as follows:

(a) ((No later than
sixty calendar days from July 16, 1991,)) The legislative authority
of each county ((that as of June 1, 1991, was required or chose to plan))
planning under RCW 36.70A.040 shall convene a meeting with
representatives of each city located within the county for the purpose of
establishing a collaborative process that will provide a framework for the
adoption of a countywide planning policy((. In other counties that are
required or choose to plan under RCW 36.70A.040, this meeting shall be convened))
no later than sixty days after the date the county adopts its resolution of
intention or was certified by the office of financial management.

(b) The process and
framework for adoption of a countywide planning policy specified in (a) of this
subsection shall determine the manner in which the county and the cities agree
to all procedures and provisions including but not limited to desired planning
policies, deadlines, ratification of final agreements and demonstration
thereof, and financing, if any, of all activities associated therewith.

(c) If a county fails
for any reason to convene a meeting with representatives of cities as required
in (a) of this subsection, the governor may immediately impose any appropriate
sanction or sanctions on the county from those specified under RCW 36.70A.340.

(d) If there is no
agreement ((by October 1, 1991, in a county that was required or chose to
plan under RCW 36.70A.040 as of June 1, 1991, or if there is no agreement))
within one hundred twenty days of the date the county adopted its resolution of
intention or was certified by the office of financial management in any ((other))
county ((that is required or chooses to plan)) planning under RCW
36.70A.040, the governor shall first inquire of the jurisdictions as to the
reason or reasons for failure to reach an agreement. If the governor deems it
appropriate, the governor may immediately request the assistance of the
department of community, trade, and economic development to mediate any
disputes that preclude agreement. If mediation is unsuccessful in resolving
all disputes that will lead to agreement, the governor may impose appropriate
sanctions from those specified under RCW 36.70A.340 on the county, city, or
cities for failure to reach an agreement as provided in this section. The
governor shall specify the reason or reasons for the imposition of any
sanction.

(e) No ((later than
July 1, 1992, the legislative authority of each county that was required or
chose to plan under RCW 36.70A.040 as of June 1, 1991, or no)) later than
fourteen months after the date the county adopted its resolution of intention
or was certified by the office of financial management, the county
legislative authority of any ((other)) county ((that is required or
chooses to plan)) planning under RCW 36.70A.040((,)) shall
adopt a countywide planning policy according to the process provided under this
section and that is consistent with the agreement pursuant to (b) of this
subsection, and after holding a public hearing or hearings on the proposed
countywide planning policy.

(3) A countywide
planning policy shall at a minimum, address the following:

(a) Policies to
implement RCW 36.70A.110;

(b) Policies for
promotion of contiguous and orderly development and provision of urban services
to such development;

(c) Policies for siting
public capital facilities of a countywide or statewide nature, including
transportation facilities of statewide significance as defined in RCW
47.06.140;

(d) Policies for
countywide transportation facilities and strategies;

(e) Policies that
consider the need for affordable housing, such as housing for all economic
segments of the population and parameters for its distribution;

(f) Policies for joint
county and city planning within urban growth areas;

(g) Policies for
countywide economic development and employment; ((and))

(h) Policies to
achieve consistency among jurisdictions within the county regarding actions
taken to comply with chapter 90.58 RCW; and

(i) An analysis
of the fiscal impact.

(4) Federal agencies
and Indian tribes may participate in and cooperate with the countywide planning
policy adoption process. Adopted countywide planning policies shall be adhered
to by state agencies.

(5) Failure to adopt a
countywide planning policy that meets the requirements of this section may
result in the imposition of a sanction or sanctions on a county or city within
the county, as specified in RCW 36.70A.340. In imposing a sanction or
sanctions, the governor shall specify the reasons for failure to adopt a
countywide planning policy in order that any imposed sanction or sanctions are
fairly and equitably related to the failure to adopt a countywide planning
policy.

(6) Cities and the
governor may appeal an adopted countywide planning policy to the growth
management hearings board within sixty days of the adoption of the countywide
planning policy.

(7) Multicounty
planning policies shall be adopted by two or more counties, each with a
population of four hundred fifty thousand or more, with contiguous urban areas
and may be adopted by other counties, according to the process established
under this section or other processes agreed to among the counties and cities
within the affected counties throughout the multicounty region.

Sec. 11. RCW 36.70A.215 and 1997
c 429 s 25 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) Subject to the
limitations in subsection (7) of this section, a county shall adopt, in
consultation with its cities, countywide planning policies to establish a
review and evaluation program. This program shall be in addition to the
requirements of RCW 36.70A.110, 36.70A.130, and 36.70A.210. In developing and
implementing the review and evaluation program required by this section, the
county and its cities shall consider information from other appropriate
jurisdictions and sources. The purpose of the review and evaluation program
shall be to:

(a) Determine whether a
county and its cities are achieving urban densities within urban growth areas
by comparing growth and development assumptions, targets, and objectives
contained in the countywide planning policies and the county and city
comprehensive plans with actual growth and development that has occurred in the
county and its cities; and

(b) Identify reasonable
measures, other than adjusting urban growth areas, that will be taken to comply
with the requirements of this chapter.

(2) The review and
evaluation program shall:

(a) Encompass land uses
and activities both within and outside of urban growth areas and provide for
annual collection of data on urban and rural land uses, development, critical
areas, and capital facilities to the extent necessary to determine the quantity
and type of land suitable for development, both for residential and
employment-based activities;

(b) Provide for
evaluation of the data collected under (a) of this subsection every five years
as provided in subsection (3) of this section. The first evaluation and
subsequent evaluations shall be completed ((not later than September 1,
2002)) according to the schedule for review of comprehensive plans and
development regulations specified in RCW 36.70A.130. The county and its
cities may establish in the countywide planning policies indicators,
benchmarks, and other similar criteria to use in conducting the evaluation;

(c) Provide for methods
to resolve disputes among jurisdictions relating to the countywide planning
policies required by this section and procedures to resolve inconsistencies in
collection and analysis of data; and

(d) Provide for the
amendment of the countywide policies and county and city comprehensive plans as
needed to remedy an inconsistency identified through the evaluation required by
this section, or to bring these policies into compliance with the requirements
of this chapter.

(3) At a minimum, the
evaluation component of the program required by subsection (1) of this section
shall:

(a) Determine whether
there is sufficient suitable land to accommodate the countywide population
projection established for the county pursuant to RCW 43.62.035 and the
subsequent population allocations within the county and between the county and
its cities and the requirements of RCW 36.70A.110;

(b) Determine the
actual density of housing that has been constructed and the actual amount of
land developed for commercial and industrial uses within the urban growth area
since the adoption of a comprehensive plan under this chapter or since the last
periodic evaluation as required by subsection (1) of this section; and

(c) Based on the actual
density of development as determined under (b) of this subsection, review
commercial, industrial, and housing needs by type and density range to
determine the amount of land needed for commercial, industrial, and housing for
the remaining portion of the twenty-year planning period used in the most
recently adopted comprehensive plan.

(4) If the evaluation
required by subsection (3) of this section demonstrates an inconsistency
between what has occurred since the adoption of the countywide planning
policies and the county and city comprehensive plans and development
regulations and what was envisioned in those policies and plans and the
planning goals and the requirements of this chapter, as the inconsistency
relates to the evaluation factors specified in subsection (3) of this section,
the county and its cities shall adopt and implement measures that are
reasonably likely to increase consistency during the subsequent five-year
period. If necessary, a county, in consultation with its cities as required by
RCW 36.70A.210, shall adopt amendments to countywide planning policies to
increase consistency. The county and its cities shall annually monitor the
measures adopted under this subsection to determine their effect and may revise
or rescind them as appropriate.

(5)(a) Not later than
July 1, 1998, the department shall prepare a list of methods used by counties
and cities in carrying out the types of activities required by this section.
The department shall provide this information and appropriate technical
assistance to counties and cities required to or choosing to comply with the
provisions of this section.

(b) By December 31,
2007, the department shall submit to the appropriate committees of the
legislature a report analyzing the effectiveness of the activities described in
this section in achieving the goals envisioned by the countywide planning
policies and the comprehensive plans and development regulations of the
counties and cities.

(6) From funds
appropriated by the legislature for this purpose, the department shall provide
grants to counties, cities, and regional planning organizations required under
subsection (7) of this section to conduct the review and perform the evaluation
required by this section.

(7) The
provisions of this section shall apply to counties, and the cities within those
counties, that were greater than one hundred fifty thousand in population in
1995 as determined by office of financial management population estimates and
that are located west of the crest of the Cascade mountain range. Any other
county planning under RCW 36.70A.040 may carry out the review, evaluation, and
amendment programs and procedures as provided in this section.

Sec. 12. RCW 36.70A.480 and 1995
c 347 s 104 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) For shorelines of
the state, the goals and policies of the shoreline management act as set forth
in RCW 90.58.020 are ((added as)) one of the goals of this chapter as
set forth in RCW 36.70A.020. The goals and policies of a shoreline master
program for a county or city approved under chapter 90.58 RCW ((shall be
considered)) are an element of the county or city's comprehensive
plan as specified in RCW 36.70A.070. All other portions of the
shoreline master program for a county or city adopted under chapter 90.58 RCW,
including use regulations, ((shall be considered)) are a part of
the county or city's development regulations as defined in RCW 36.70A.030.

(2) The shoreline
master program shall be adopted ((pursuant to the procedures of chapter
90.58 RCW rather than the procedures set forth in this chapter for the adoption
of a comprehensive plan or development regulations)) as an element of
the comprehensive plan adopted according to this chapter and consistent with
the requirements of this chapter and chapter 90.58 RCW.

Sec. 13. RCW 36.70A.320 and 1997
c 429 s 20 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) Except as provided
in subsection (5) of this section, comprehensive plans and development
regulations, and amendments thereto, adopted under this chapter are presumed
valid upon adoption.

(2) Except as otherwise
provided in subsection (4) of this section, the burden is on the petitioner to
demonstrate that any action taken by a state agency, county, or city under this
chapter is not in compliance with the requirements of this chapter.

(3) In any petition
under this chapter, the board, after full consideration of the petition, shall
determine whether there is compliance with the requirements of this chapter.
In making its determination, the board shall consider the criteria adopted by
the department under RCW 36.70A.190(4). The board shall find compliance unless
it determines that the action by the state agency, county, or city is clearly
erroneous in view of the entire record before the board and in light of the
goals and requirements of this chapter.

(4) A county or city
subject to a determination of invalidity made under RCW 36.70A.300 or
36.70A.302 has the burden of demonstrating that the ordinance or resolution it
has enacted in response to the determination of invalidity will no longer
substantially interfere with the fulfillment of the goals of this chapter under
the standard in RCW 36.70A.302(1).

(5) The shoreline
element of a comprehensive plan and the applicable development regulations
adopted by a county or city shall take effect as provided in chapter 90.58
RCW. A shoreline master program constituting both the shoreline element of
a comprehensive plan and shoreline development regulations shall be reviewed
according to the requirements of this chapter and chapter 90.58 RCW.

PART II‑-SHORELINE
MANAGEMENT ACT

Sec. 14. RCW 90.58.030 and 1996 c
265 s 1 are each amended to read as follows:

As used in this
chapter, unless the context otherwise requires, the following definitions and
concepts apply:

(1) Administration:

(a)
"Department" means the department of ecology;

(b)
"Director" means the director of the department of ecology;

(c) "Local
government" means any county, incorporated city, or town which contains
within its boundaries any lands or waters subject to this chapter;

(d) "Person"
means an individual, partnership, corporation, association, organization,
cooperative, public or municipal corporation, or agency of the state or local
governmental unit however designated;

(e) "Hearing
board" means the shoreline hearings board established by this chapter.

(2) Geographical:

(a) "Extreme low
tide" means the lowest line on the land reached by a receding tide;

(b) "Ordinary high
water mark" on all lakes, streams, and tidal water is that mark that will
be found by examining the bed and banks and ascertaining where the presence and
action of waters are so common and usual, and so long continued in all ordinary
years, as to mark upon the soil a character distinct from that of the abutting
upland, in respect to vegetation as that condition exists on June 1, 1971, as
it may naturally change thereafter, or as it may change thereafter in
accordance with permits issued by a local government or the department:
PROVIDED, That in any area where the ordinary high water mark cannot be found,
the ordinary high water mark adjoining salt water shall be the line of mean
higher high tide and the ordinary high water mark adjoining fresh water shall
be the line of mean high water;

(c) "Shorelines of
the state" are the total of all "shorelines" and
"shorelines of statewide significance" within the state;

(d)
"Shorelines" means all of the water areas of the state, including
reservoirs, and their associated shorelands, together with the lands underlying
them; except (i) shorelines of statewide significance; (ii) shorelines on
segments of streams upstream of a point where the mean annual flow is twenty
cubic feet per second or less and the wetlands associated with such upstream
segments; and (iii) shorelines on lakes less than twenty acres in size and
wetlands associated with such small lakes;

(e) "Shorelines of
statewide significance" means the following shorelines of the state:

(i) The area between
the ordinary high water mark and the western boundary of the state from Cape
Disappointment on the south to Cape Flattery on the north, including harbors,
bays, estuaries, and inlets;

(ii) Those areas of
Puget Sound and adjacent salt waters and the Strait of Juan de Fuca between the
ordinary high water mark and the line of extreme low tide as follows:

(A) Nisqually Delta‑-from
DeWolf Bight to Tatsolo Point,

(B) Birch Bay‑-from
Point Whitehorn to Birch Point,

(C) Hood Canal‑-from
Tala Point to Foulweather Bluff,

(D) Skagit Bay and
adjacent area‑-from Brown Point to Yokeko Point, and

(E) Padilla Bay‑-from
March Point to William Point;

(iii) Those areas of
Puget Sound and the Strait of Juan de Fuca and adjacent salt waters north to
the Canadian line and lying seaward from the line of extreme low tide;

(iv) Those lakes,
whether natural, artificial, or a combination thereof, with a surface acreage
of one thousand acres or more measured at the ordinary high water mark;

(v) Those natural
rivers or segments thereof as follows:

(A) Any west of the
crest of the Cascade range downstream of a point where the mean annual flow is
measured at one thousand cubic feet per second or more,

(B) Any east of the
crest of the Cascade range downstream of a point where the annual flow is
measured at two hundred cubic feet per second or more, or those portions of rivers
east of the crest of the Cascade range downstream from the first three hundred
square miles of drainage area, whichever is longer;

(vi) Those shorelands
associated with (i), (ii), (iv), and (v) of this subsection (2)(e);

(f)
"Shorelands" or "shoreland areas" means those lands
extending landward for two hundred feet in all directions as measured on a
horizontal plane from the ordinary high water mark; floodways and contiguous
floodplain areas landward two hundred feet from such floodways; and all wetlands
and river deltas associated with the streams, lakes, and tidal waters which are
subject to the provisions of this chapter; the same to be designated as to
location by the department of ecology. Any county or city may determine that
portion of a one-hundred-year-flood plain to be included in its master program
as long as such portion includes, as a minimum, the floodway and the adjacent
land extending landward two hundred feet therefrom;

(g)
"Floodway" means those portions of the area of a river valley lying
streamward from the outer limits of a watercourse upon which flood waters are
carried during periods of flooding that occur with reasonable regularity,
although not necessarily annually, said floodway being identified, under normal
condition, by changes in surface soil conditions or changes in types or quality
of vegetative ground cover condition. The floodway shall not include those
lands that can reasonably be expected to be protected from flood waters by
flood control devices maintained by or maintained under license from the
federal government, the state, or a political subdivision of the state;

(h)
"Wetlands" means areas that are inundated or saturated by surface
water or ground water at a frequency and duration sufficient to support, and
that under normal circumstances do support, a prevalence of vegetation
typically adapted for life in saturated soil conditions. Wetlands generally
include swamps, marshes, bogs, and similar areas. Wetlands do not include
those artificial wetlands intentionally created from nonwetland sites,
including, but not limited to, irrigation and drainage ditches, grass-lined
swales, canals, detention facilities, wastewater treatment facilities, farm
ponds, and landscape amenities, or those wetlands created after July 1, 1990,
that were unintentionally created as a result of the construction of a road,
street, or highway. Wetlands may include those artificial wetlands
intentionally created from nonwetland areas to mitigate the conversion of
wetlands.

(3) Procedural terms:

(a) "Comprehensive
land use plan," "comprehensive plan," or "plan" has
the same meaning as in RCW 36.70A.030;

(b) "Critical
areas" has the same meaning as in RCW 36.70A.030;

(c) "Development
regulations" has the same meaning as in RCW 36.70A.030;

(d)
"Guidelines" means those standards adopted to implement the policy of
this chapter for regulation of use of the shorelines of the state prior to
adoption of master programs. Such standards shall also provide criteria to
local governments and the department in developing master programs;

(((b))) (e)
"Master program" shall mean the comprehensive use plan for a
described area, and the use regulations together with maps, diagrams, charts,
or other descriptive material and text, a statement of desired goals, and
standards developed in accordance with the policies enunciated in RCW 90.58.020.
The master program is an element of the comprehensive plan developed and
adopted under chapter 36.70A RCW, subject to the requirements of this chapter;

(((c))) (f)
"State master program" is the cumulative total of all master programs
approved or adopted by the department of ecology;

(((d))) (g)
"Development" means a use consisting of the construction or exterior
alteration of structures; dredging; drilling; dumping; filling; removal of any
sand, gravel, or minerals; bulkheading; driving of piling; placing of
obstructions; or any project of a permanent or temporary nature which
interferes with the normal public use of the surface of the waters overlying
lands subject to this chapter at any state of water level;

(((e))) (h)
"Substantial development" shall mean any development of which the
total cost or fair market value exceeds two thousand five hundred dollars, or
any development which materially interferes with the normal public use of the
water or shorelines of the state; except that the following shall not be
considered substantial developments for the purpose of this chapter:

(i) Normal maintenance
or repair of existing structures or developments, including damage by accident,
fire, or elements;

(ii) Construction of
the normal protective bulkhead common to single family residences;

(iii) Emergency
construction necessary to protect property from damage by the elements;

(iv) Construction and
practices normal or necessary for farming, irrigation, and ranching activities,
including agricultural service roads and utilities on shorelands, and the
construction and maintenance of irrigation structures including but not limited
to head gates, pumping facilities, and irrigation channels. A feedlot of any
size, all processing plants, other activities of a commercial nature,
alteration of the contour of the shorelands by leveling or filling other than
that which results from normal cultivation, shall not be considered normal or
necessary farming or ranching activities. A feedlot shall be an enclosure or
facility used or capable of being used for feeding livestock hay, grain,
silage, or other livestock feed, but shall not include land for growing crops
or vegetation for livestock feeding and/or grazing, nor shall it include normal
livestock wintering operations;

(v) Construction or
modification of navigational aids such as channel markers and anchor buoys;

(vi) Construction on
shorelands by an owner, lessee, or contract purchaser of a single family
residence for his or her own use or for the use of his or her
family, which residence does not exceed a height of thirty-five feet above
average grade level and which meets all requirements of the state agency or
local government having jurisdiction thereof, other than requirements imposed
pursuant to this chapter;

(vii) Construction of a
dock, including a community dock, designed for pleasure craft only, for the
private noncommercial use of the owner, lessee, or contract purchaser of single
and multiple family residences. This exception applies if either: (A) In salt
waters, the fair market value of the dock does not exceed two thousand five
hundred dollars; or (B) in fresh waters, the fair market value of the dock does
not exceed ten thousand dollars, but if subsequent construction having a fair
market value exceeding two thousand five hundred dollars occurs within five
years of completion of the prior construction, the subsequent construction
shall be considered a substantial development for the purpose of this chapter;

(viii) Operation,
maintenance, or construction of canals, waterways, drains, reservoirs, or other
facilities that now exist or are hereafter created or developed as a part of an
irrigation system for the primary purpose of making use of system waters,
including return flow and artificially stored ground water for the irrigation
of lands;

(ix) The marking of
property lines or corners on state owned lands, when such marking does not
significantly interfere with normal public use of the surface of the water;

(x) Operation and
maintenance of any system of dikes, ditches, drains, or other facilities
existing on September 8, 1975, which were created, developed, or utilized
primarily as a part of an agricultural drainage or diking system;

(xi) Site exploration
and investigation activities that are prerequisite to preparation of an
application for development authorization under this chapter, if:

(A) The activity does
not interfere with the normal public use of the surface waters;

(B) The activity will
have no significant adverse impact on the environment including, but not
limited to, fish, wildlife, fish or wildlife habitat, water quality, and
aesthetic values;

(C) The activity does
not involve the installation of a structure, and upon completion of the
activity the vegetation and land configuration of the site are restored to
conditions existing before the activity;

(D) A private entity
seeking development authorization under this section first posts a performance
bond or provides other evidence of financial responsibility to the local
jurisdiction to ensure that the site is restored to preexisting conditions; and

(E) The activity is not
subject to the permit requirements of RCW 90.58.550;

(xii) The process of
removing or controlling an aquatic noxious weed, as defined in RCW 17.26.020,
through the use of an herbicide or other treatment methods applicable to weed
control that are recommended by a final environmental impact statement
published by the department of agriculture or the department jointly with other
state agencies under chapter 43.21C RCW.

Sec. 15. RCW 90.58.060 and 1995 c
347 s 304 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) The department
shall periodically review and adopt guidelines consistent with RCW 90.58.020,
containing the elements specified in RCW 90.58.100 for:

(a) Development of
master programs for regulation of the uses of shorelines; and

(b) Development of
master programs for regulation of the uses of shorelines of statewide
significance.

(2) Before adopting or
amending guidelines under this section, the department shall provide an
opportunity for public review and comment as follows:

(a) The department
shall mail copies of the proposal to all cities, counties, and federally
recognized Indian tribes, and to any other person who has requested a copy, and
shall publish the proposed guidelines in the Washington state register.
Comments shall be submitted in writing to the department within sixty days from
the date the proposal has been published in the register.

(b) The department
shall hold at least four public hearings on the proposal in different locations
throughout the state to provide a reasonable opportunity for residents in all
parts of the state to present statements and views on the proposed guidelines.
Notice of the hearings shall be published at least once in each of the three
weeks immediately preceding the hearing in one or more newspapers of general
circulation in each county of the state. If an amendment to the guidelines
addresses an issue limited to one geographic area, the number and location of
hearings may be adjusted consistent with the intent of this subsection to
assure all parties a reasonable opportunity to comment on the proposed
amendment. The department shall accept written comments on the proposal during
the sixty-day public comment period and for seven days after the final public
hearing.

(c) At the conclusion
of the public comment period, the department shall review the comments received
and modify the proposal consistent with the provisions of this chapter. The
proposal shall then be published for adoption pursuant to the provisions of
chapter 34.05 RCW.

(3) The department may
propose amendments to the guidelines not more than once each year. ((At
least once every five years the department shall conduct a review of the
guidelines pursuant to the procedures outlined in subsection (2) of this
section.))

Sec. 16. RCW 90.58.070 and 1971
ex.s. c 286 s 7 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) ((Local
governments)) (a) Counties and cities not planning under RCW 36.70A.040
are directed with regard to shorelines of the state in their various
jurisdictions to submit to the director of the department, ((within)) at
least six months ((from June 1, 1971)) before the deadline
specified in RCW 90.58.080, letters stating that they propose to complete
an inventory and develop master programs for these shorelines as provided for
in RCW 90.58.080.

(b) Counties and
cities planning under RCW 36.70A.040 are directed with regard to shorelines of
the state in their various jurisdictions to submit to the director of the department,
at least six months before the deadline specified in RCW 36.70A.130, letters
stating that they propose to complete an inventory and develop master programs
for these shorelines as provided for in RCW 90.58.080. Counties and cities
planning under RCW 36.70A.040 shall submit the master program to the department
for review and approval no later than one hundred twenty days before final
adoption.

(2) If any local
government fails to submit a letter as ((provided in)) required by
subsection (1) of this section, or fails to adopt a master program for the
shorelines of the state within its jurisdiction in accordance with the time
schedule provided in this chapter, the department shall carry out the
requirements of RCW 90.58.080 and adopt a master program for the shorelines of
the state within the jurisdiction of the local government.

Sec. 17. RCW 90.58.080 and 1995 c
347 s 305 are each amended to read as follows:

((Local governments
shall develop or amend, within twenty-four months after the adoption of
guidelines as provided in RCW 90.58.060, a master program for regulation of
uses of the shorelines of the state consistent with the required elements of
the guidelines adopted by the department.))

(1) Local
governments shall develop or amend master programs for regulation of uses of
the shorelines of the state consistent with the required elements of the
guidelines according to the schedule for review of comprehensive plans,
policies, and regulations specified in RCW 36.70A.130.

(2) The department
may extend the date by which a county or city is required to develop or amend a
master program if the county or city demonstrates that it is proceeding in an
orderly fashion, and is making a good faith effort, to meet these requirements.
An extension may be for up to an additional one hundred eighty days. The
length of an extension shall be based on the difficulty of the effort to
conform with these requirements and shall be consistent with any extension
granted by the department of community, trade, and economic development
according to RCW 36.70A.045.

Sec. 18. RCW 90.58.090 and 1997 c
429 s 50 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) A master program,
segment of a master program, or an amendment to a master program shall become
effective when approved by the department. Within the time period provided in
RCW 90.58.080, each ((local government)) county and city shall
have submitted a master program, either totally or by segments, for all
shorelines of the state within its jurisdiction to the department for review
and approval.

(2) Upon receipt of a
proposed master program or amendment, the department shall:

(a) Provide notice to and
opportunity for written comment by all interested parties of record as a part
of the local government review process for the proposal and to all persons,
groups, and agencies that have requested in writing notice of proposed master
programs or amendments generally or for a specific area, subject matter, or
issue. The comment period shall be at least thirty days, unless the department
determines that the level of complexity or controversy involved supports a
shorter period;

(b) In the department's
discretion, conduct a public hearing during the thirty-day comment period in
the jurisdiction proposing the master program or amendment;

(c) Within fifteen days
after the close of public comment, request the local government to review the
issues identified by the public, interested parties, groups, and agencies and
provide a written response as to how the proposal addresses the identified
issues;

(d) Within thirty days
after receipt of the local government response pursuant to (c) of this
subsection, make written findings and conclusions regarding the consistency of
the proposal with the policy of RCW 90.58.020 and the applicable guidelines,
provide a response to the issues identified in (c) of this subsection, and
either approve the proposal as submitted, recommend specific changes necessary
to make the proposal approvable, or deny approval of the proposal in those
instances where no alteration of the proposal appears likely to be consistent
with the policy of RCW 90.58.020 and the applicable guidelines. The written
findings and conclusions shall be provided to the local government, all
interested persons, parties, groups, and agencies of record on the proposal;

(e) If the department
recommends changes to the proposed master program or amendment, within thirty
days after the department mails the written findings and conclusions to the
local government, the local government may:

(i) Agree to the
proposed changes. The receipt by the department of the written notice of
agreement constitutes final action by the department approving the amendment;
or

(ii) Submit an
alternative proposal. If, in the opinion of the department, the alternative is
consistent with the purpose and intent of the changes originally submitted by
the department and with this chapter it shall approve the changes and provide
written notice to all recipients of the written findings and conclusions. If
the department determines the proposal is not consistent with the purpose and
intent of the changes proposed by the department, the department may resubmit
the proposal for public and agency review pursuant to this section or reject
the proposal.

(3) Within one
hundred twenty days of the date the department receives a proposed master
program from a county or city planning under RCW 36.70A.040, the department
shall issue a decision approving or denying approval of the master program.
The department may alter the time periods specified in subsection (2) of this
section to allow for a decision to be issued within the time required by this
subsection. A county or city planning under RCW 36.70A.040 shall include the
master program adopted by the department as the shoreline element of its
comprehensive plan and the shoreline development regulations implementing the
shoreline element before final adoption.

(4) The
department shall approve the segment of a master program relating to shorelines
unless it determines that the submitted segments are not consistent with the
policy of RCW 90.58.020 and the applicable guidelines.

(((4))) (5)
The department shall approve those segments of the master program relating to
shorelines of statewide significance only after determining the program
provides the optimum implementation of the policy of this chapter to satisfy
the statewide interest. If the department does not approve a segment of a
local government master program relating to a shoreline of statewide
significance, the department may develop and by rule adopt an alternative to
the local government’s proposal.

(((5))) (6)
In the event a local government has not complied with the requirements of RCW
90.58.070 it may thereafter upon written notice to the department elect to
adopt a master program for the shorelines within its jurisdiction, in which
event it shall comply with the provisions established by this chapter for the
adoption of a master program for such shorelines.

Upon approval of such
master program by the department it shall supersede such master program as may
have been adopted by the department for such shorelines.

(((6))) (7)
A master program or amendment to a master program takes effect when and in such
form as approved or adopted by the department. Shoreline master programs that
were adopted by the department prior to July 22, 1995, in accordance with the provisions
of this section then in effect, shall be deemed approved by the department in
accordance with the provisions of this section that became effective on that
date. The department shall maintain a record of each master program, the
action taken on any proposal for adoption or amendment of the master program,
and any appeal of the department's action. The department's approved document
of record constitutes the official master program.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
19. A new section is added
to chapter 90.58 RCW to read as follows:

Not later than December
1, 2001, each local government planning under RCW 36.70A.040 shall establish by
ordinance or resolution an integrated and consolidated planning process for the
development and adoption of comprehensive plans and development regulations
under chapter 36.70A RCW and shoreline master programs under this chapter. The
process shall include the following elements:

(1) Coordination of the
planning process to satisfy the requirements of chapter 36.70A RCW and this
chapter;

(2) Development of a
public participation program to satisfy the requirements of chapter 36.70A RCW
and this chapter;

(3) Review of
scientific and other information to satisfy the requirements of chapter 36.70A
RCW and this chapter;

(4) Opportunity for
review and consideration of comment from agencies and other interested parties
as required by chapter 36.70A RCW and this chapter;

(5) Consolidation of
public hearing and comment processes to satisfy the requirements of chapter
36.70A RCW and this chapter;

(6) Timing of submittal
of master program elements to the department of ecology to allow sufficient
time for review and approval by the department of ecology and to adhere to the
schedule for review, revision, and adoption of comprehensive plans and
development regulations specified in RCW 36.70A.130(2);

(7) Consolidation of
amendment and adoption procedures and processes to satisfy the requirements of
chapter 36.70A RCW and this chapter; and

(8) Any other
provisions not inconsistent with the requirements of chapter 36.70A RCW,
chapter 43.21C RCW, or this chapter.

Sec. 20. RCW 90.58.100 and 1997 c
369 s 7 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) The master programs
provided for in this chapter, when adopted or approved by the department shall
constitute use regulations for the various shorelines of the state. The
goals and policies of the master program constitute the shoreline element of
the comprehensive plan adopted according to chapter 36.70A RCW, and the use
regulations included within the master program constitute development
regulations as defined in chapter 36.70A RCW. In preparing the master
programs, and any amendments thereto, the department and local governments
shall to the extent feasible:

(a) Utilize a
systematic interdisciplinary approach which will insure the integrated use of
the natural and social sciences and the environmental design arts;

(b) Consult with and
obtain the comments of any federal, state, regional, or local agency having any
special expertise with respect to any environmental impact;

(c) Consider all plans,
studies, surveys, inventories, and systems of classification made or being made
by federal, state, regional, or local agencies, by private individuals, or by
organizations dealing with pertinent shorelines of the state;

(d) Conduct or support
such further research, studies, surveys, and interviews as are deemed
necessary;

(e) Utilize all
available information regarding hydrology, geography, topography, ecology,
economics, and other pertinent data;

(f) Employ, when
feasible, all appropriate, modern scientific data processing and computer
techniques to store, index, analyze, and manage the information gathered.

(2) The master programs
shall include, when appropriate, the following:

(a) An economic
development element for the location and design of industries, industrial
projects of statewide significance, transportation facilities, port facilities,
tourist facilities, commerce and other developments that are particularly
dependent on their location on or use of the shorelines of the state;

(b) A public access
element making provision for public access to publicly owned areas;

(c) A recreational
element for the preservation and enlargement of recreational opportunities,
including but not limited to parks, tidelands, beaches, and recreational areas;

(d) A circulation
element consisting of the general location and extent of existing and proposed
major thoroughfares, transportation routes, terminals, and other public
utilities and facilities, all correlated with the shoreline use element;

(e) A use element which
considers the proposed general distribution and general location and extent of
the use on shorelines and adjacent land areas for housing, business, industry,
transportation, agriculture, natural resources, recreation, education, public
buildings and grounds, and other categories of public and private uses of the
land;

(f) A conservation
element for the preservation of natural resources, including but not limited to
scenic vistas, aesthetics, and vital estuarine areas for fisheries and wildlife
protection;

(g) An historic,
cultural, scientific, and educational element for the protection and
restoration of buildings, sites, and areas having historic, cultural,
scientific, or educational values;

(h) An element that
gives consideration to the statewide interest in the prevention and
minimization of flood damages; and

(i) Any other element
deemed appropriate or necessary to effectuate the policy of this chapter.

(3) The master programs
shall include such map or maps, descriptive text, diagrams and charts, or other
descriptive material as are necessary to provide for ease of understanding.

(4) Master programs
will reflect that state-owned shorelines of the state are particularly adapted
to providing wilderness beaches, ecological study areas, and other recreational
activities for the public and will give appropriate special consideration to
same.

(5) Each master program
shall contain provisions to allow for the varying of the application of use
regulations of the program, including provisions for permits for conditional
uses and variances, to insure that strict implementation of a program will not
create unnecessary hardships or thwart the policy enumerated in RCW 90.58.020.
Any such varying shall be allowed only if extraordinary circumstances are shown
and the public interest suffers no substantial detrimental effect. The concept
of this subsection shall be incorporated in the rules adopted by the department
relating to the establishment of a permit system as provided in RCW
90.58.140(3).

(6) Each master program
shall contain standards governing the protection of single family residences
and appurtenant structures against damage or loss due to shoreline erosion.
The standards shall govern the issuance of substantial development permits for
shoreline protection, including structural methods such as construction of
bulkheads, and nonstructural methods of protection. The standards shall
provide for methods which achieve effective and timely protection against loss
or damage to single family residences and appurtenant structures due to
shoreline erosion. The standards shall provide a preference for permit
issuance for measures to protect single family residences occupied prior to
January 1, 1992, where the proposed measure is designed to minimize harm to the
shoreline natural environment.

Sec. 21. RCW 90.58.110 and 1971
ex.s. c 286 s 11 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) Whenever it shall
appear to the director that a master program should be developed for a region
of the shorelines of the state which includes lands and waters located in two
or more adjacent local government jurisdictions, the director shall designate
such region and notify the appropriate units of local government thereof. It
shall be the duty of the notified units to develop cooperatively an inventory
and master program in accordance with and within the time provided in RCW
90.58.080.

(2) Subject to the
timing requirements of RCW 36.70A.130 and 90.58.080 and at the discretion
of the department, a local government master program may be adopted in segments
applicable to particular areas so that immediate attention may be given to
those areas of the shorelines of the state in most need of a use regulation.

Sec. 22. RCW 90.58.130 and 1971
ex.s. c 286 s 13 are each amended to read as follows:

To insure that all
persons and entities having an interest in the guidelines and master programs
developed under this chapter are provided with a full opportunity for
involvement in both their development and implementation, the department and
local governments shall:

(1) Make reasonable
efforts to inform the people of the state about the shoreline management
program of this chapter and in the performance of the responsibilities provided
in this chapter, shall not only invite but actively encourage participation by
all persons and private groups and entities showing an interest in shoreline
management programs of this chapter; and

(2) Invite and
encourage participation by all agencies of federal, state, and local
government, including municipal and public corporations, having interests or
responsibilities relating to the shorelines of the state. State and local
agencies are directed to participate fully to insure that their interests are
fully considered by the department and local governments. These regulations
shall be incorporated into the planning process required by section 6 of this
act and be part of the public participation process required by RCW 36.70A.140.

Sec. 23. RCW 90.58.250 and 1971
ex.s. c 286 s 25 are each amended to read as follows:

The department is
directed to cooperate fully with local governments in discharging their
responsibilities under this chapter. Funds shall be available for distribution
to local governments on the basis of applications for preparation of master
programs. Such applications shall be submitted in accordance with regulations
developed by the department. The department is authorized to make and
administer grants within appropriations authorized by the legislature to any
local government within the state for the purpose of developing a master
shorelines program.

((No grant shall be
made in an amount in excess of the recipient's contribution to the estimated
cost of such program.))

NEW SECTION. Sec.
24. Part headings used in
this act are not any part of the law.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 25. This act is necessary for
the immediate preservation of the public peace, health, or safety, or support
of the state government and its existing public institutions, and takes effect
July 1, 2001.

---
END ---