BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF
WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1. RCW 90.58.080 and 1995 c
347 s 305 are each amended to read as follows:

Local
governments shall develop or amend, within twenty-four months after the
adoption of guidelines as provided in RCW 90.58.060, a master program for
regulation of uses of the shorelines of the state consistent with the required
elements of the guidelines adopted by the department. If the area covered
by a local government master plan contains a species listed as threatened or
endangered under 16 U.S.C. Sec. 1538, the local government must either: (1)
Use the sections of the guidelines adopted under RCW 90.58.060 that have been
approved as sufficient to protect that species; or (2) obtain an approved
habitat conservation plan under 16 U.S.C. Sec. 1539 or an exemption under 16
U.S.C. Sec. 1533(d) prior to approval by the department.

--- END ---