BE IT ENACTED
BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1. A new section is added
to chapter 9A.42 RCW to read as follows:

(1) A parent, stepparent, foster parent, guardian, or other
individual who has been entrusted with the physical custody of a child under
eighteen years of age or with the physical custody of a dependent person has a
duty to aid such child or dependent person who is being physically assaulted or
who is being subjected to abuse or neglect, as defined in RCW 26.44.020, by
another. The scope of the duty is determined by the circumstances known at the
time to the parent, stepparent, foster parent, guardian, or other individual
who has been entrusted with the physical custody of a child under eighteen
years of age or with the physical custody of a dependent person.

(2) The failure to make a reasonable effort to aid is a class C
felony. A reasonable effort does not require a parent, stepparent, foster
parent, guardian, or other individual who has been entrusted with the physical
custody of a child under eighteen years of age or with the physical custody of
a dependent person to perform any action that a reasonable person would believe
would place that person or another person in danger of immediate substantial
bodily harm.

Sec. 2. RCW 9A.42.010 and 1997 c
392 s 508 are each amended to read as follows:

As used in this chapter:

(1) "Basic necessities of life" means food, water,
shelter, clothing, and medically necessary health care, including but not
limited to health-related treatment or activities, hygiene, oxygen, and
medication.

(2)(a) "Bodily injury" means physical pain or injury,
illness, or an impairment of physical condition;

(b) "Substantial bodily harm" means bodily injury which
involves a temporary but substantial disfigurement, or which causes a temporary
but substantial loss or impairment of the function of any bodily part or organ,
or which causes a fracture of any bodily part;

(c) "Great bodily harm" means bodily injury which creates
a high probability of death, or which causes serious permanent disfigurement,
or which causes a permanent or protracted loss or impairment of the function of
any bodily part or organ.

(3) "Child" means a person under eighteen years of age.

(4) "Dependent person" means a person who, because of
physical or mental disability, or because of extreme advanced age, is dependent
upon another person to provide the basic necessities of life. A resident of a
nursing home, as defined in RCW 18.51.010, a resident of an adult family home,
as defined in RCW 70.128.010, and a frail elder or vulnerable adult, as defined
in RCW 74.34.020(((8))) (13), is presumed to be a dependent
person for purposes of this chapter.

(5) "Employed" means hired by a dependent person, another
person acting on behalf of a dependent person, or by an organization or
governmental entity, to provide to a dependent person any of the basic
necessities of life. A person may be "employed" regardless of
whether the person is paid for the services or, if paid, regardless of who pays
for the person's services.

(6) "Parent" has its ordinary meaning and also includes a
guardian and the authorized agent of a parent or guardian.

(7) "Abandons" means leaving a child or other dependent
person without the means or ability to obtain one or more of the basic
necessities of life.

(8) "Aid" means to give help or
relief, or to assist. "Aid" includes, but is not limited to,
contacting police, law enforcement, or other public officials, preventing abuse
and neglect as defined in RCW 26.44.020, preventing physical assault, or
procuring medical assistance.

--- END ---