BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF
WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1. RCW 26.04.020 and 1998 c
1 s 4 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) Marriages in the
following cases are prohibited:

(a) When either party
thereto has a wife or husband living at the time of such marriage;

(b) When the husband
and wife are nearer of kin to each other than second cousins, whether of the
whole or half blood computing by the rules of the civil law; or

(c) When the parties
are persons other than a male and a female.

(2) It is unlawful for
any man to marry his father's sister, mother's sister, daughter, sister, son's
daughter, daughter's daughter, brother's daughter or sister's daughter; it is
unlawful for any woman to marry her father's brother, mother's brother, son,
brother, son's son, daughter's son, brother's son or sister's son.

(3) A marriage between
two persons that is recognized as valid in another jurisdiction is valid in
this state only if the marriage is not prohibited ((or made unlawful))
under subsection (1)(a)((,)) or (1)(c) of this section, or
unlawful under subsection (2) of this section.

(4) The uniting of
two persons in a nonmarital domestic relationship, including a civil union,
domestic partnership, or other similar relationship when the persons are other
than a male and a female is not valid in this state and such a uniting of two
persons recognized as valid in another jurisdiction is not recognized as valid
in this state.

(5) A person in a
nonmarital domestic relationship shall not qualify for, or receive, any
spousal, familial, or marital benefit, privilege, advantage, or entitlement, or
any equivalent thereof, that is paid for, directly or indirectly, in whole or
in part, with public funds.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 2. The secretary of state
shall submit this act to the people for their adoption and ratification, or
rejection, at the next general election to be held in this state, in accordance
with Article II, section 1 of the state Constitution and the laws adopted to
facilitate its operation.

---
END ---