BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF
WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1. RCW 49.46.020 and 1999 c
1 s 1 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) Until January 1,
1999, every employer shall pay to each of his or her employees who has reached
the age of eighteen years wages at a rate of not less than four dollars and
ninety cents per hour.

(2) Beginning January
1, 1999, and until January 1, 2000, every employer shall pay to each of his or
her employees who has reached the age of eighteen years wages at a rate of not
less than five dollars and seventy cents per hour.

(3) Beginning January
1, 2000, and until January 1, 2001, every employer shall pay to each of his or
her employees who has reached the age of eighteen years wages at a rate of not
less than six dollars and fifty cents per hour.

(4)(a) Except as
provided under (c) of this subsection, beginning on January 1, 2001, and
each following January 1st as set forth under (b) of this subsection, every
employer shall pay to each of his or her employees who has reached the age of
eighteen years wages at a rate of not less than the amount established under
(b) of this subsection.

(b) On September 30,
2000, and on each following September 30th, the department of labor and
industries shall calculate an adjusted minimum wage rate to maintain employee
purchasing power by increasing the current year's minimum wage rate by the rate
of inflation. The adjusted minimum wage rate shall be calculated to the
nearest cent using the consumer price index for urban wage earners and clerical
workers, CPI-W, or a successor index, for the twelve months prior to each
September 1st as calculated by the United States department of labor. Each
adjusted minimum wage rate calculated under this subsection (4)(b) takes effect
on the following January 1st.

(c) On September 30,
2001, and on each following September 30th, the department of labor and
industries shall establish an adjusted minimum tipped wage rate that is equal
to seventy-five percent of the adjusted minimum wage rate calculated under (b)
of this subsection, but no less than six dollars and seventy-two cents per
hour. Each adjusted minimum tipped wage rate established under this subsection
(4)(c) takes effect on the following January 1st. Employers certified under
section 2 of this act shall pay to each of his or her directly tipped employees
wages at a rate of not less than the amount established under this subsection
(4)(c).

(5) The director shall
by regulation establish the minimum wage for employees under the age of
eighteen years.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
2. A new section is added
to chapter 49.46 RCW to read as follows:

The department of labor
and industries shall establish a process for certifying employers of directly
tipped employees as eligible to pay the adjusted minimum tipped wage rate
established under RCW 49.46.020(4)(c). To apply for certification, employers shall
submit a fifty dollar annual fee and report the total tips of directly tipped
employees reported to the internal revenue service for the previous year and
the total hours worked by directly tipped employees during the previous year.
If the total tips of directly tipped employees divided by the total hours
worked by directly tipped employees is more than the current adjusted minimum
wage rate calculated under RCW 49.46.020(4)(b), the department shall certify
the employer as eligible to pay the adjusted minimum tipped wage rate.

As used in
this section, "directly tipped employee" means an employee who
customarily and regularly receives gratuities directly from the customer in
recognition of a service performed and who is employed by an employer with a standard
industry code of 58, 70, or 79 or a North American industry code of 713, 721,
or 722.

---
END ---