BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF
WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec.
1. A new section is added
to chapter 41.32 RCW under the subchapter heading "plan 1" to read as
follows:

Members employed by
school districts or educational service districts who reach thirty years of
service may earn additional service credit of two percent per year towards
their retirement benefit under the following conditions:

(1) The board of
directors of the school district and the employee, through a special one-year
contract, agree to the arrangement;

(2) The contract may
last for a maximum of one year, but may be renewed on a year-by-year basis at
the option of the board of directors; and

(3) The
policy of permitting an employee to accrue additional service credit is either
specifically permitted in the local collective bargaining agreement for certificated
employees or is agreed to by the school directors and the local bargaining
representative for certificated employees.

--- END ---