BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF
WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec.
1. INTENT. (1) The legislature
declares that:

(a) The social security
account number was first intended for use solely by the federal government as a
way of tracking the earnings of an individual in order to determine the amount
of social security taxes to credit to the individual's account;

(b) Over the years, the
use of the social security account number by both the public and private
sectors for other purposes has increased;

(c) The increased use
of the social security account number for other purposes has led to an increase
of stolen and misappropriated social security account numbers, identity theft,
and fraud;

(d) Although federal
law provides some limits on the use of the social security account number by
government agencies, the federal law does not prohibit private companies from
asking for a person's social security account number;

(e) Federal laws
provide little protection against private companies misusing a person's social
security account number;

(f) With today's
technology, the use of the social security account number as a personal
identifier is less necessary than in the past; and

(g) There are other
identification methods available, such as using an algorithm to digitize a
person's name or other identifying information, or issuing personal identifying
numbers known only to the individual and company.

(2) The legislature
intends to protect the privacy of the citizens of Washington by requiring
financial institutions to provide a person with the option of using a number
other than the person's social security account number for purposes of
numerical identification and recordkeeping.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
2. DEFINITIONS. The
definitions in this section apply throughout this chapter unless the context
clearly requires otherwise.

(1)
"Customer" means a natural person who has an account or who regularly
or repeatedly engages in transactions with a financial institution.

(2) "Financial
institution" means a bank, trust company, mutual savings bank, savings and
loan association, or credit union authorized by federal or state law to accept
deposits in this state.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
3. MANDATORY USE OF SOCIAL
SECURITY ACCOUNT NUMBER PROHIBITED. (1) A financial institution shall not
require a customer to utilize his or her social security account number as a
means of personal identification for the purpose of engaging in transactions,
accessing accounts, obtaining account information, obtaining services, or
otherwise conducting business with the financial institution.

(2) A financial
institution shall not require that, as a condition precedent to opening an
account, a prospective customer consent to the use of his or her social
security account number for the purpose of identification to the financial
institution.

(3) A financial
institution may utilize a customer's social security account number as a means
of personal identification only if the customer consents in writing to such use
and the customer is given the option of choosing a different numerical
identifier as a means of identifying himself or herself to the financial
institution.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
4. CONFORMITY WITH OTHER
STATE OR FEDERAL LAW. This chapter does not prohibit the lawful use of social
security account numbers by financial institutions when the use of social
security account numbers is explicitly required by state or federal law.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
5. REMEDIES FOR
NONCOMPLIANCE. (1) A customer may bring a civil action for damages, injunctive
relief, or both against a financial institution that has failed to comply with
this chapter. If the violation is inadvertent, the individual may recover his
or her actual damages. If the violation is due to negligence, damages are to
be in the amount of five hundred dollars, or actual damages, whichever is
greater, as well as the costs of the suit, including attorneys' fees. Upon a
showing that the violation of this chapter was willful, a court may increase
the award of damages in an amount not more than three times the actual damages
sustained, or one thousand five hundred dollars, whichever is greater, as well
as the costs of the suit, including attorneys' fees.

(2) The attorney
general may bring a civil action for damages, injunctive relief, or both
against a financial institution that has failed to comply with this chapter.
Damages are the same as those for individual plaintiffs under subsection (1) of
this section.

(3) The legislature
finds that the practices covered by this chapter are matters vitally affecting
the public interest for the purpose of applying the consumer protection act,
chapter 19.86 RCW. A violation of this chapter is not reasonable in relation
to the development and preservation of business and is an unfair or deceptive
act in trade or commerce and an unfair method of competition for the purpose of
applying the consumer protection act, chapter 19.86 RCW. Remedies under
chapter 19.86 RCW are available in addition to the remedies under this chapter.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
6. Captions used in this act
are not any part of the law.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 7. Sections 1 through 6 of
this act constitute a new chapter in Title 19 RCW.

---
END ---