BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF
WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec.
1. INTENT. The legislature intends
to provide affordable access to legal education and meet the legal needs of the
state of Washington in public interest areas of the law. The high cost of
attending law school requires that attorneys command high incomes to repay the
financial obligations incurred in obtaining the required training. As a result
of the need for high incomes, few attorneys are able to practice in public
interest areas of the law, which traditionally pay substantially less than
other areas. The legislature finds that encouraging outstanding law students
and attorneys to practice in public interest areas of the law is essential to
assuring access to legal services in areas of public interest.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
2. DEFINITIONS. Unless the
context clearly requires otherwise, the definitions in this section apply
throughout this chapter.

(1) "Board"
means the higher education coordinating board.

(2) "Eligible
education and training programs" means education and training programs
approved by the board that lead to eligibility for a license to practice law as
a licensed attorney.

(3) "Eligible
expenses" means reasonable expenses associated with the costs of acquiring
an education such as tuition, books, equipment, fees, room and board, and other
expenses determined by the board.

(4) "Eligible
participant" means an eligible licensed attorney who is a resident of the
state of Washington, and who can provide proof of residency including, but not
limited to:

(a) Registration or
payment of Washington taxes or fees on a motor vehicle, mobile home, travel
trailer, boat, or any other item of personal property owned or used by the
person for which state registration or the payment of a state tax or fees is
required;

(b) Permanent full-time
employment in the state of Washington; or

(c) Registration to
vote for state officials in the state of Washington.

(5)
"Forgiven" or "to forgive" or "forgiveness" means
to render legal services in a public interest area of the law in the state of
Washington in lieu of monetary repayment.

(6) "Licensed
attorney" means an attorney who has successfully passed the Washington
state bar exam and been admitted to practice in the state of Washington or has
otherwise been licensed to practice law in the state of Washington by the
Washington state bar association and who resides in the state of Washington.

(7) "Loan
repayment" means a loan that is paid in full or in part if the participant
renders legal services in Washington in a public interest area of the law.

(8)
"Participant" means a licensed attorney who has received a loan
repayment award and has commenced practice as a licensed attorney in Washington
in a public interest area of the law.

(9) "Program"
means the public interest attorney loan repayment program.

(10) "Public
interest area of the law" means those areas of the law determined by the
board in consultation with the advisory committee to serve the public interest
including, but not limited to:

(a) Providing direct
legal service at a legal services organization, the attorney general's office,
prosecuting attorneys' offices, or criminal public defender association or
program;

(b) Providing indirect
legal services at a legal services organization, the attorney general's office,
prosecuting attorneys' association, or criminal public defender association or
program; or

(c) Practicing in some
other capacity that the advisory committee determines serves the public
interest.

(11) "Required
service obligation" means an obligation by the participant to provide
legal services in Washington in a public interest area of the law for a period
of time to be established as provided for in this chapter.

(12)
"Satisfied" means paid in full.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
3. PROGRAM‑-DUTIES OF
BOARD. The public interest attorney loan repayment program is established for
licensed attorneys who practice or agree to practice in public interest areas
of the law in the state of Washington. The program shall be administered by
the board. In administering this program, the board shall establish an
advisory committee. The committee may include, but is not limited to, one
representative from the Washington state bar association, one representative
from the access to justice board, and up to two representatives from each of
the law schools located in the state of Washington. The advisory committee
shall also include one law student representative from each law school in the
state.

(1) The advisory
committee shall advise the board in performing the following duties:

(a) Adopting rules and
developing guidelines to administer the program;

(b) Collecting and
managing repayments from participants who do not meet their service obligations
under this chapter; and

(c) Developing criteria
for a contract for service in lieu of the service obligation where appropriate,
that may be a combination of service and payment.

(2) The advisory committee
shall publicize the program and solicit grants and donations from public and
private sources for the program, to be accepted by the board and deposited into
the public interest attorney loan repayment endowment account.

(3) The advisory
committee shall select licensed attorneys to participate in the loan repayment
program. In selecting eligible participants, the committee may consider the
following criteria:

(a) A demonstrated
commitment on the part of the applicant to practice in public interest areas of
the law;

(b) The financial need
of the applicant;

(c) The demand for the
type of public interest work the applicant seeks to perform;

(d) A declared interest
by the applicant to practice in rural areas of the state of Washington where
the need for public interest attorneys is high;

(e) The scholastic
achievements of the applicant; and

(f) Any other criteria
the committee deems relevant to the selection process.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
4. LOAN REPAYMENT‑-REQUIRED
SERVICE OBLIGATION. The board shall establish loan repayments for licensed
attorneys who practice in a public interest area of the law. The amount of the
loan repayment shall not exceed fifteen thousand dollars per year for a maximum
of five years per individual. Participants incur an obligation to repay the
loan under section 6 of this act unless they practice for one year in a public
interest area of the law for each year of loan repayment received.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
5. LOAN REPAYMENT AWARDS.
(1) The board may grant loan repayment awards to eligible participants from the
funds appropriated for this purpose, or from any private or public funds
deposited in the public interest attorney loan repayment endowment account.

(2) Funds appropriated
for the program, including reasonable administrative costs, may be used by the
board for the purposes of loan repayments. The board shall annually establish
the total amount of funding to be awarded for loan repayments and such allocations
shall be established based upon the best use of funding for that year.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
6. PARTICIPANT OBLIGATION‑-REPAYMENT
OBLIGATION. Participants in the public interest attorney loan repayment
program who are awarded loan repayments shall receive payment from the program
for the purpose of repaying educational loans secured while attending a program
of legal training that led to a license to practice law in the state of
Washington.

(1) Participants shall
agree to meet the required service obligation in a designated public interest
area of the law.

(2) Repayment shall be
limited to eligible educational and living expenses as determined by the board
and shall include principal and interest.

(3) Loans from both
government and private sources may be repaid by the program. Participants
shall agree to allow the board access to loan records and to acquire
information from lenders necessary to verify eligibility and to determine
payments. Loans may not be renegotiated with lenders to accelerate repayment.

(4) Repayment of loans
under this chapter shall begin no later than ninety days after the individual
has become a participant. Payments shall be made quarterly, or more frequently
if deemed appropriate by the board, to the participant or the lender until the
loan is repaid or until the required service obligation is fulfilled and
eligibility discontinues, whichever comes first.

(5) Should the
participant discontinue practicing in a public interest area of the law,
payments against the loans of the participant shall cease to be effective on
the date that the participant discontinues service.

(6) Except for
circumstances beyond their control, participants who serve less than the
required service obligation shall be obligated to repay to the program an
amount equal to twice the total amount paid by the program on their behalf in
addition to any payments on the unsatisfied portion of the principal and
interest. The board shall determine the applicability of this subsection.

(7) The board is
responsible for the collection of payments made on behalf of participants from
the participants who discontinue service before completion of the required
service obligation. The board shall exercise due diligence in collection,
maintaining all necessary records to ensure that the maximum amount of payment
made on behalf of the participant is recovered. Collection under this section
shall be pursued using the full extent of the law, including wage garnishment
if necessary.

(8) The board is not
responsible for any outstanding payments on principal and interest to any
lenders once a participant's eligibility expires.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
7. PUBLIC INTEREST ATTORNEY
LOAN REPAYMENT ENDOWMENT ACCOUNT. (1) The public interest attorney loan
repayment endowment account is created in the custody of the state treasurer.
The account shall be a nontreasury account retaining its interest earnings in
accordance with RCW 43.79A.040.

(2) The board shall
deposit in the account all money received for the program. The account shall
be self-sustaining and consist of funds appropriated by the legislature for the
public interest attorney loan repayment program, private contributions to the
program, and receipts from participant repayments.

(3) Expenditures from
the account shall not exceed half of each appropriation by the legislature
until the program becomes self-sustaining and shall be used for loan repayments
for eligible attorneys and the board's administrative costs associated with the
awarding, tracking, and collection of the loans. Appropriations to the program
shall end when the account becomes self-sustaining.

(4) With the exception
of the operating costs associated with the management of the account by the
treasurer's office as authorized in chapter 43.79A RCW, the account shall be
credited with all investment income earned by the account.

(5) Disbursements from
the account are exempt from appropriations and the allotment provisions of
chapter 43.88 RCW. Money used for program administration is subject to the
allotment and budgetary controls of chapter 43.88 RCW, and an appropriation is
required for expenditures.

(6) Disbursements from
the account shall be made only on the authorization of the board.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
8. POWERS AND DUTIES OF THE
INVESTMENT BOARD. (1) The investment board has the full power to invest,
reinvest, manage, contract, sell, or exchange investment money in the account.
All investment and operating costs associated with the investment of money
shall be paid pursuant to RCW 43.33A.160 and 43.84.160. With the exception of
these expenses, the earnings from the investment of the money shall be retained
by the account.

(2) All investments
made by the investment board shall be made with the exercise of that degree of
judgment and care pursuant to RCW 43.33A.140 and the investment policy
established by the state investment board.

(3) As deemed
appropriate by the investment board, money in the account may be commingled for
investment with other funds subject to investment by the board.

(4) The authority to
establish all policies relating to the account, other than the investment
policies in subsections (1) through (3) of this section, resides with the
board. With the exception of expenses of the investment board in subsection
(1) of this section, disbursements from the account shall be made only on the
authorization of the governing body, and money in the account may be spent only
for the purposes of the program as specified in this chapter.

(5) The investment
board shall routinely consult and communicate with the higher education
coordinating board on the investment policy, earnings of the trust, and related
needs of the program.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
9. TRANSFER OF PROGRAM
ADMINISTRATION. After consulting with the board, the governor may transfer
the administration of this program to another agency with an appropriate
mission.

Sec. 10. RCW 43.79A.040 and 2000
c 79 s 45 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) Money in the
treasurer's trust fund may be deposited, invested, and reinvested by the state
treasurer in accordance with RCW 43.84.080 in the same manner and to the same
extent as if the money were in the state treasury.

(2) All income received
from investment of the treasurer's trust fund shall be set aside in an account
in the treasury trust fund to be known as the investment income account.

(3) The investment
income account may be utilized for the payment of purchased banking services on
behalf of treasurer's trust funds including, but not limited to, depository,
safekeeping, and disbursement functions for the state treasurer or affected
state agencies. The investment income account is subject in all respects to
chapter 43.88 RCW, but no appropriation is required for payments to financial
institutions. Payments shall occur prior to distribution of earnings set forth
in subsection (4) of this section.

(4)(a) Monthly, the
state treasurer shall distribute the earnings credited to the investment income
account to the state general fund except under (b) and (c) of this subsection.

(b) The following
accounts and funds shall receive their proportionate share of earnings based
upon each account's or fund's average daily balance for the period: The public
interest attorney loan repayment endowment account, the Washington advanced
college tuition payment program account, the agricultural local fund, the
American Indian scholarship endowment fund, the basic health plan
self-insurance reserve account, the Washington international exchange
scholarship endowment fund, the developmental disabilities endowment trust
fund, the energy account, the fair fund, the game farm alternative account, the
grain inspection revolving fund, the juvenile accountability incentive account,
the rural rehabilitation account, the stadium and exhibition center account,
the youth athletic facility ((grant)) account, the self-insurance
revolving fund, the sulfur dioxide abatement account, and the children's trust
fund. However, the earnings to be distributed shall first be reduced by the
allocation to the state treasurer's service fund pursuant to RCW 43.08.190.

(c) The following
accounts and funds shall receive eighty percent of their proportionate share of
earnings based upon each account's or fund's average daily balance for the
period: The advanced right of way revolving fund, the advanced environmental
mitigation revolving account, the federal narcotics asset forfeitures account,
the high occupancy vehicle account, the local rail service assistance account,
and the miscellaneous transportation programs account.

(5) In conformance with
Article II, section 37 of the state Constitution, no trust accounts or funds
shall be allocated earnings without the specific affirmative directive of this
section.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
11. CAPTIONS NOT LAW.
Captions as used in this chapter are not any part of the law.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 12. Sections 1 through 9 and
11 of this act constitute a new chapter in Title 28B RCW.

---
END ---