BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF
WASHINGTON:

_5 Sec. 1. RCW
82.08.0283 and 1998 c 168 s 2 are each amended to read

_6 as follows:

_7 The tax levied by RCW 82.08.020 shall not apply to
sales of

_8 insulin; prosthetic devices and the components thereof;
dental

_9 appliances, devices, restorations, and substitutes, and
the

10 diagnostic items and the impressions and molds
therefor, or

11 components thereof, including but not limited to full
and partial

12 dentures, crowns, inlays, fillings, braces, and
retainers;

13 orthotic devices prescribed for an individual by a
person licensed

14 under chapters 18.22, 18.25, 18.57, or 18.71 RCW;
hearing

15 instruments dispensed or fitted by a person licensed or
certified

16 under chapter 18.35 RCW, and the components thereof;
medicines of

17 mineral, animal, and botanical origin prescribed,
administered,

18 dispensed, or used in the treatment of an individual by
a person

p. 1 HB
1979

_1 licensed under chapter 18.36A RCW; ostomic items; and
medically

_2 prescribed oxygen, including, but not limited to, oxygen

_3 concentrator systems, oxygen enricher systems, liquid
oxygen

_4 systems, and gaseous, bottled oxygen systems prescribed
for an

_5 individual by a person licensed under chapter 18.57 or
18.71 RCW

_6 for use in the medical treatment of that individual. In
addition,

_7 the tax levied by RCW 82.08.020 shall not apply to
charges made

_8 for labor and services rendered in respect to the repairing,

_9 cleaning, altering, or improving of any of the items
exempted

10 under this section.

11 Sec. 2. RCW
82.12.0277 and 1998 c 168 s 3 are each amended to read

12 as follows:

13 The provisions of this chapter shall not apply in
respect to

14 the use of insulin; prosthetic devices and the
components thereof;

15 dental appliances, devices, restorations, and
substitutes, and

16 the diagnostic items and the impressions and molds
therefor, or

17 components thereof, including but not limited to full
and partial

18 dentures, crowns, inlays, fillings, braces, and
retainers;

19 orthotic devices prescribed for an individual by a
person licensed

20 under chapters 18.22, 18.25, 18.57, or 18.71 RCW;
hearing

21 instruments dispensed or fitted by a person licensed or
certified

22 under chapter 18.35 RCW, and the components thereof;
medicines of

23 mineral, animal, and botanical origin prescribed,
administered,

24 dispensed, or used in the treatment of an individual by
a person

25 licensed under chapter 18.36A RCW; ostomic items; and
medically

26 prescribed oxygen, including, but not limited to, oxygen

27 concentrator systems, oxygen enricher systems, liquid
oxygen

28 systems, and gaseous, bottled oxygen systems prescribed
for an

29 individual by a person licensed under chapter 18.57 or
18.71 RCW

30 for use in the medical treatment of that individual.

31 NEW SECTION. Sec. 3. This act is necessary
for the immediate

32 preservation of the public peace, health, or safety, or
support of

33 the state government and its existing public
institutions, and

34 takes effect immediately.

‑‑‑ END ‑‑‑

HB 1979 p. 2