BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF
WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1. RCW 28A.335.190 and 2000
c 138 s 201 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) When, in the
opinion of the board of directors of any school district, the cost of any
furniture, supplies, equipment, building, improvements, or repairs, or other
work or purchases, except books, will equal or exceed the sum of fifty thousand
dollars, complete plans and specifications for such work or purchases shall be
prepared and notice by publication given in at least one newspaper of general
circulation within the district, once each week for two consecutive weeks, of
the intention to receive bids therefor and that specifications and other
information may be examined at the office of the board or any other officially
designated location: PROVIDED, That the board without giving such notice may
make improvements or repairs to the property of the district through the shop
and repair department of such district when the total of such improvements or
repair does not exceed the sum of (a) fifteen thousand dollars, for districts
with fifteen thousand five hundred or more full-time equivalent students; or
(b) for districts with fewer than fifteen thousand five hundred full-time
equivalent students, fifteen thousand dollars if more than one craft or trade
is involved with the school district improvement or repair, or ten thousand
dollars if a single craft or trade is involved with the school district
improvement or repair. The cost of any public work, improvement or repair for
the purposes of this section shall be the aggregate of all amounts to be paid
for labor, material, and equipment on one continuous or interrelated project
where work is to be performed simultaneously or in close sequence. The bids
shall be in writing and shall be opened and read in public on the date and in
the place named in the notice and after being opened shall be filed for public
inspection.

(2) Every purchase of
furniture, equipment or supplies, except books, the cost of which is estimated
to be in excess of fifteen thousand dollars, shall be on a competitive basis.
The board of directors shall establish a procedure for securing telephone
and/or written quotations for such purchases. Whenever the estimated cost is
from fifteen thousand dollars up to fifty thousand dollars, the procedure shall
require quotations from at least three different sources to be obtained in
writing or by telephone, and recorded for public perusal. Whenever the
estimated cost is in excess of fifty thousand dollars, the public bidding
process provided in subsection (1) of this section shall be followed.

(3) Every building,
improvement, repair or other public works project, the cost of which is
estimated to be in excess of (a) fifteen thousand dollars, for districts with
fifteen thousand five hundred or more full-time equivalent students; or (b) for
districts with fewer than fifteen thousand five hundred full-time equivalent
students, fifteen thousand dollars if more than one craft or trade is involved
with the school district improvement or repair, or ten thousand dollars if a
single craft or trade is involved with the school district improvement or
repair, shall be on a competitive bid process. Whenever the estimated cost of
a public works project is fifty thousand dollars or more, the public bidding
process provided in subsection (1) of this section shall be followed unless the
contract is let using the small works roster process in RCW 39.04.155 or under
any other procedure authorized for school districts. One or more school
districts may authorize an educational service district to establish and
operate a small works roster for the school district under the provisions of
RCW 39.04.155.

(4)(a) Subject to
(b) of this subsection, the contract for the work or purchase shall be
awarded to the lowest responsible bidder as defined in RCW 43.19.1911 but the
board may by resolution reject any and all bids and may make further
calls for bids in the same manner as the original call.

(b) The board may,
after review, reject the bid of any bidder, if the board determines that it is
in the best interests of the safety and well-being of the students, the public,
or the employees of the school.

(c) On any work
or purchase the board shall provide bidding information to any qualified bidder
or the bidder's agent, requesting it in person.

(5) In the event of any
emergency when the public interest or property of the district would suffer
material injury or damage by delay, upon resolution of the board declaring the
existence of such an emergency and reciting the facts constituting the same,
the board may waive the requirements of this section with reference to any
purchase or contract: PROVIDED, That an "emergency", for the
purposes of this section, means a condition likely to result in immediate
physical injury to persons or to property of the school district in the absence
of prompt remedial action.

(6) This
section does not apply to the direct purchase of school buses by school
districts and educational services in accordance with RCW 28A.160.195.

--- END ---