BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF
WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec.
1. The legislature finds and
declares that patients with certain chronic debilitating medical conditions
have a critical need to live in high temperature environments in order to
sustain their functioning and prevent a worsening of health conditions that are
likely life-threatening. Their ability to maintain a comfortable body
temperature can directly affect the course of their illnesses.
Temperature-sensitive patients include those on life-support equipment; or who
are paraplegic or quadriplegic; with scleroderma, compromised immune systems;
or suffering from other life-threatening illnesses, including spinal cord
injuries, rheumatoid arthritis and diabetes. With inadequate heating, a
patient's internal organs degenerate with diminished blood supply ultimately
leading to emergent and more costly health services such as transplants and
dialysis. The financial trauma of the onset or progression of these serious
illnesses, coupled with inordinate heating costs, may require these patients to
become dependent on the state for the costs of meeting more serious and
intractable conditions. With the hope of preventing the onset of more
debilitating conditions and avoiding higher health costs associated with them,
it is the intent of the legislature to encourage power, light, and gas
distribution businesses in this state to offer discounts on heating costs to
temperature-sensitive patients by providing credits against the taxes imposed
by this chapter for customer payment reductions in accordance with the
provisions of this act.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
2. A new section is added
to chapter 82.16 RCW to read as follows:

(1) A light and power
business or a gas distribution business may take a credit against the tax
imposed by this chapter for customer payment reductions, subject to subsection
(2) of this section.

(2) A customer must
submit an application for a payment reduction to the department of community,
trade, and economic development. The application must contain a signed
statement from a licensed physician or osteopathic physician who certifies that
the patient is a temperature-sensitive person with a qualifying illness or
condition as provided under subsection (3)(b) of this section. After reviewing
the application, the department of community, trade, and economic development
will transmit an approved application to the light and power and gas
distribution businesses currently servicing the customer. Upon receipt of an
approved application, a light and power business and gas distribution business
must begin providing the customer with a payment reduction and begin taking the
credit authorized under subsection (1) of this section.

(3) For the purposes of
this section and unless the context clearly requires otherwise, the following
definitions apply:

(a) "Payment
reduction" means a financial diminution in the amount of money a customer
must remit to a light and power business or gas distribution business for
services which qualify a light and power business or gas distribution business
for a tax credit authorized under subsection (1) of this section. A payment
reduction must not exceed fifty percent of the money owed to a light and power
business or gas distribution business for services.

(b)
"Customer" means an individual that requires light and power service
or gas service and that:

(i) Has peripheral
circulatory problems, including paraplegia, quadriplegia, hemiplegia, diabetes,
raynaud's disease or raynaud's phenomenon, or multiple sclerosis;

(ii) Has a disease that
affects the joints such as scleroderma, rheumatoid arthritis, lupus,
osteoarthritis; or

(iii) Requires regular
use of life-support equipment.

(4)
Application for a payment reduction may only be made in the form and manner
prescribed by the department of community, trade, and economic development.
The department may adopt any rules necessary for the effective administration
of this section.

---
END ---