BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF
WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec.
1. The legislature finds
that family and medical leave is designed to help working people fulfill both
their work and family responsibilities. The legislature also finds that, when
an individual who takes family and medical leave subsequently becomes eligible
to receive unemployment compensation, the maximum benefits payable to the
individual are decreased and the weekly benefit amount payable to the
individual may be decreased. The legislature intends to eliminate these
unintended consequences of taking family and medical leave.

Sec. 2. RCW 50.04.020 and 1994 c
3 s 1 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) "Base
year" with respect to each individual, shall mean either the first four of
the last five completed calendar quarters or the last four completed calendar
quarters immediately preceding the first day of the individual's benefit year.

(2) For the
purposes of establishing a benefit year, the department shall initially use the
first four of the last five completed calendar quarters as the base year. If a
benefit year is not established using the first four of the last five calendar
quarters as the base year, the department shall use the last four completed
calendar quarters as the base year. At the request of an individual who
took family and medical leave in one or more calendar quarters in the base
year, the department shall use the following four calendar quarters as the base
year: The calendar quarters in the base year in which the individual did not
take family and medical leave; and the calendar quarters immediately preceding
the base year in which the individual did not take family and medical leave.
The department shall not use any calendar quarters in which the individual took
family and medical leave.

(3) Computations
using the last four completed calendar quarters shall be based on available
wage items processed as of the close of business on the day preceding the date
of application. The department shall promptly contact employers to request
assistance in obtaining wage information for the last completed calendar
quarter if it has not been reported at the time of initial application.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
3. A new section is added
to chapter 50.04 RCW to read as follows:

"Family and
medical leave" means leave taken under either the federal family and
medical leave act of 1993 (Act of Feb. 5, 1993, P.L. 103-3, 107 Stat. 6) or the
state family leave law, chapter 49.78 RCW.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
4. If any part of this act
is found to be in conflict with federal requirements that are a prescribed
condition to the allocation of federal funds to the state or the eligibility of
employers in this state for federal unemployment tax credits, the conflicting
part of this act is inoperative solely to the extent of the conflict, and the
finding or determination does not affect the operation of the remainder of this
act. Rules adopted under this act must meet federal requirements that are a
necessary condition to the receipt of federal funds by the state or the
granting of federal unemployment tax credits to employers in this state.

NEW SECTION.
Sec. 5. This act is necessary for
the immediate preservation of the public peace, health, or safety, or support
of the state government and its existing public institutions, and takes effect
July 1, 2001, for new claims filed after June 30, 2001.

---
END ---