BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF
WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1. RCW 19.16.100 and 1994 c
195 s 1 are each amended to read as follows:

Unless a different
meaning is plainly required by the context, the following words and phrases as
hereinafter used in this chapter shall have the following meanings:

(1) "Person"
includes individual, firm, partnership, trust, joint venture, association, or
corporation.

(2) "Collection
agency" means and includes:

(a) Any person directly
or indirectly engaged in soliciting claims for collection, or collecting or
attempting to collect claims owed or due or asserted to be owed or due another
person;

(b) Any person who
directly or indirectly furnishes or attempts to furnish, sells, or offers to
sell forms represented to be a collection system or scheme intended or
calculated to be used to collect claims even though the forms direct the debtor
to make payment to the creditor and even though the forms may be or are
actually used by the creditor himself or herself in his or her
own name;

(c) Any person who in
attempting to collect or in collecting his or her own claim uses a
fictitious name or any name other than his or her own which would
indicate to the debtor that a third person is collecting or attempting to
collect such claim.

(3) "Collection
agency" does not mean and does not include:

(a) Any individual
engaged in soliciting claims for collection, or collecting or attempting to
collect claims on behalf of a licensee under this chapter, if said individual
is an employee of the licensee;

(b) Any individual
collecting or attempting to collect claims for not more than one employer, if
all the collection efforts are carried on in the name of the employer and if
the individual is an employee of the employer;

(c) Any person whose
collection activities are carried on in his, her, or its true name and
are confined and are directly related to the operation of a business other than
that of a collection agency, such as but not limited to trust companies,
savings and loan associations, building and loan associations, abstract
companies doing an escrow business, real estate brokers, public officers acting
in their official capacities, persons acting under court order, lawyers,
insurance companies, credit unions, loan or finance companies, mortgage banks,
and banks;

(d) Any person who on
behalf of another person prepares or mails monthly or periodic statements of
accounts due if all payments are made to that other person and no other
collection efforts are made by the person preparing the statements of account;
((or))

(e) An
"out-of-state collection agency" as defined in this chapter; or

(f) Any person while
acting as a debt collector for another person, both of whom are related by
common ownership or affiliated by corporate control, if the person acting as a
debt collector does so only for persons to whom it is so related or affiliated
and if the principal business of the person is not the collection of debts.

(4) "Out-of-state
collection agency" means a person whose activities within this state are
limited to collecting debts from debtors located in this state by means of
interstate communications, including telephone, mail, or facsimile
transmission, from the person's location in another state on behalf of clients
located outside of this state, but does not include any person who is
excluded from the definition of the term "debt collector" under the
federal fair debt collection practices act (15 U.S.C. Sec. 1692a(6)).

(5) "Claim"
means any obligation for the payment of money or thing of value arising out of
any agreement or contract, express or implied.

(6) "Statement of
account" means a report setting forth only amounts billed, invoices,
credits allowed, or aged balance due.

(7)
"Director" means the director of licensing.

(8) "Client"
or "customer" means any person authorizing or employing a collection
agency to collect a claim.

(9)
"Licensee" means any person licensed under this chapter.

(10) "Board"
means the Washington state collection agency board.

(11)
"Debtor" means any person owing or alleged to owe a claim.

--- END ---