BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF
WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec.
1. A new section is added
to chapter 82.04 RCW to read as follows:

(1)(a) Employers in
this state who are taxable under this chapter and provide financial incentives
to their own or other employees for ride sharing, for using public
transportation, for using car sharing, or for using nonmotorized commuting
before June 30, 2006, shall be allowed a credit for amounts paid to or on
behalf of employees for ride sharing in vehicles carrying two or more persons,
for using public transportation, for using car sharing, or for using
nonmotorized commuting, not to exceed sixty dollars per employee per year.

(b) Property managers
who are taxable under this chapter and provide financial incentives to persons
employed at a worksite in this state managed by the property manager for ride
sharing, for using public transportation, for using car sharing, or for using
nonmotorized commuting before June 30, 2006, shall be allowed a credit for
amounts paid to or on behalf of these persons for ride sharing in vehicles
carrying two or more persons, for using public transportation, for using car
sharing, or for using nonmotorized commuting, not to exceed sixty dollars per
person per year. A person may not take a credit under this section for amounts
claimed for credit by other persons.

(c) The credit shall be
equal to the amount paid to or on behalf of each employee multiplied by fifty
percent, but may not exceed sixty dollars per employee per year. The credit
may not exceed the amount of tax that would otherwise be due under this
chapter.

(2) Application for tax
credit under this section may only be made in the form and manner prescribed in
rules adopted by the department.

(3) The credit shall be
taken against taxes due for the same calendar year in which the amounts for
which credit is claimed were paid to or on behalf of employees for ride
sharing, for using public transportation, for using car sharing, or for using
nonmotorized commuting and must be claimed by the due date of the last tax
return for the calendar year in which the payment is made.

(4) The director shall
on the 25th of February, May, August, and November of each year advise the
state treasurer of the amount of credit taken during the preceding calendar
quarter ending on the last day of December, March, June, and September,
respectively.

(5) On the first of
April, July, October, and January of each year, the state treasurer based upon
information provided by the department shall deposit to the general fund a sum
equal to the dollar amount of the credit provided under subsection (1) of this
section from the multimodal transportation account.

(6) The commute trip
reduction task force shall determine the effectiveness of this tax credit as
part of its ongoing evaluation of the commute trip reduction law and report to
the legislative transportation committee and to the fiscal committees of the
house of representatives and the senate. The report shall include information
on the amount of tax credits claimed to date and recommendations on future
funding for the tax credit program. The report shall be incorporated into the
recommendations required in RCW 70.94.537(5).

(7) Any person who knowingly
makes a false statement of a material fact in the application for a credit
under subsection (1) of this section is guilty of a gross misdemeanor.

(8) A person may not
receive credit for amounts paid to or on behalf of the same employee under both
this section and section 4 of this act.

(9) This section
expires December 31, 2006.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
2. A new section is added
to chapter 82.04 RCW to read as follows:

(1) The department
shall keep a running total of all credits granted under sections 1 and 4 of
this act and all grants provided under section 6 of this act during each
calendar year, and shall disallow any credits that would cause the tabulation
for credits and grants in any calendar year to exceed five million dollars.

(2) No person is
eligible for tax credits under sections 1 and 4 of this act in excess of one
hundred thousand dollars in any calendar year.

(3) No person is
eligible for tax credits under section 1 of this act in excess of the amount of
tax that would otherwise be due under this chapter.

(4) No portion of an
application for credit disallowed under this section may be carried back or
carried forward.

(5) No person is
eligible for tax credits under sections 1, 4, and 6 of this act within the same
calendar year.

(6) This section
expires December 31, 2006.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
3. A new section is added
to chapter 82.04 RCW to read as follows:

The definitions set
forth in this section apply to sections 1, 2, 4, 5, and 6 of this act unless
the context clearly requires otherwise.

(1) "Public
agency" means any county, city, or other local government agency or any
state government agency, board, or commission.

(2) "Public
transportation" means the same as "public transportation
service" as defined in RCW 36.57A.010 and includes passenger services of
the Washington state ferries.

(3) "Nonmotorized
commuting" means commuting to and from the workplace by an employee by
walking or running or by riding a bicycle or other device not powered by a
motor.

(4) "Ride
sharing" means the same as "commuter ride sharing" as defined in
RCW 46.74.010, including ride sharing on Washington state ferries.

(5) "Car
sharing" means a membership program intended to offer an alternative to
car ownership under which persons or entities that become members are permitted
to use vehicles from a fleet on an hourly basis.

(6) This section
expires December 31, 2006.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
4. A new section is added
to chapter 82.16 RCW to read as follows:

(1)(a) Employers in
this state who are taxable under this chapter and provide financial incentives
to their own or other employees for ride sharing, for using public transportation,
for using car sharing, or for using nonmotorized commuting before June 30,
2006, shall be allowed a credit for amounts paid to or on behalf of employees
for ride sharing in vehicles carrying two or more persons, for using public
transportation, or for using nonmotorized commuting, not to exceed sixty
dollars per employee per year.

(b) Property managers
who are taxable under this chapter and provide financial incentives to persons
employed at a worksite in this state managed by the property manager for ride
sharing, for using public transportation, for using car sharing, or for using
nonmotorized commuting before June 30, 2006, shall be allowed a credit for
amounts paid to or on behalf of these persons for ride sharing in vehicles
carrying two or more persons, for using public transportation, for using car
sharing, or for using nonmotorized commuting, not to exceed sixty dollars per
person per year. A person may not take a credit under this section for amounts
claimed for credit by other persons.

(c) The credit shall be
equal to the amount paid to or on behalf of each employee multiplied by fifty
percent, but may not exceed sixty dollars per employee per year. The credit
may not exceed the amount of tax that would otherwise be due under this chapter.

(2) Application for tax
credit under this section may only be made in the form and manner prescribed in
rules adopted by the department.

(3) The credit shall be
taken against taxes due for the same calendar year in which the amounts for
which credit is claimed were paid to or on behalf of employees for ride
sharing, for using public transportation, for using car sharing, or for using
nonmotorized commuting and must be claimed by the due date of the last tax
return for the calendar year in which the payment is made.

(4) The director shall
on the 25th of February, May, August, and November of each year advise the
state treasurer of the amount of credit taken during the preceding calendar
quarter ending on the last day of December, March, June, and September,
respectively.

(5) On the first of
April, July, October, and January of each year, the state treasurer based upon
information provided by the department shall deposit to the general fund a sum
equal to the dollar amount of the credit provided under subsection (1) of this
section from the multimodal transportation account.

(6) The commute trip
reduction task force shall determine the effectiveness of this tax credit as
part of its ongoing evaluation of the commute trip reduction law and report to
the legislative transportation committee and to the fiscal committees of the
house of representatives and the senate. The report shall include information
on the amount of tax credits claimed to date and recommendations on future
funding for the tax credit program. The report shall be incorporated into the
recommendations required in RCW 70.94.537(5).

(7) Any person who
knowingly makes a false statement of a material fact in the application for a
credit under subsection (1) of this section is guilty of a gross misdemeanor.

(8) A person may not
receive credit for amounts paid to or on behalf of the same employee under both
this section and section 1 of this act.

(9) This section
expires December 31, 2006.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
5. A new section is added
to chapter 82.16 RCW to read as follows:

(1) The department
shall keep a running total of all credits granted under sections 1 and 4 of
this act and all grants provided under section 6 of this act during each
calendar year, and shall disallow any credits that would cause the tabulation
for credits and grants in any calendar year to exceed five million dollars.

(2) No person is
eligible for tax credits under sections 1 and 4 of this act in excess of one
hundred thousand dollars in any calendar year.

(3) No person is
eligible for tax credits under section 4 of this act in excess of the amount of
tax that would otherwise be due under this chapter.

(4) No portion of an
application for credit disallowed under this section may be carried back or
carried forward.

(5) No person is
eligible for tax credits under sections 1, 4, and 6 of this act within the same
calendar year.

(6) This section
expires December 31, 2006.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
6. A new section is added
to chapter 70.94 RCW to read as follows:

(1) The department of
transportation shall administer a grant program for public agencies, nonprofit
organizations, developers, and property managers who provide financial
incentives for ride sharing in vehicles carrying two or more persons, for using
public transportation, for using car sharing, or for using nonmotorized
commuting, before June 30, 2006, to their own or other employees.

(2) Public agencies,
nonprofit organizations, developers, and property managers are not eligible
within the same calendar year for grants provided under this section and
credits under section 1 or 4 of this act.

(3) The amount of the
grant is equal to the amount paid to or on behalf of each employee multiplied
by fifty percent, but may not exceed sixty dollars per employee per year.

(4) No public agency,
nonprofit organization, developer, or property manager is eligible for grants
under this section in excess of one hundred thousand dollars in any calendar
year.

(5) No more than two
million dollars in grants may be awarded in any calendar year.

(6) The department of
transportation shall report to the department of revenue by the 15th day of
each month the aggregate monetary amount of grants provided under this section
in the prior month and the identity of the recipients of those grants.

(7) The total of
credits granted under sections 1 and 4 of this act and grants provided under
this section may not exceed five million dollars in any calendar year. The
department of revenue shall notify the department of transportation when this
limitation has been reached.

(8) The source of funds
for this grant program is the multimodal transportation account.

(9) This section
expires December 31, 2006.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 7. This act takes effect
January 1, 2002, if specific funding necessary to fulfill the purposes of this
act is provided to the multimodal transportation account by December 31, 2001.
If funding is not provided, this act is void in its entirety.

---
END ---