BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF
WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec.
1. The legislature finds
that use of best financial management practices by school districts leads to
efficient and effective use of state and district resources, improves district
performance and accountability, and helps build public confidence in district
operations. Therefore, the legislature intends to design and implement an
evaluation system to determine if school districts are employing best financial
management practices.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
2. (1) The joint legislative
audit and review committee, with the assistance of the state auditor, shall
design a system that can be used to evaluate whether a school district is
employing best financial management practices. The system must include the
identification of criteria that can be used to evaluate financial management
practices in specific functional areas. The specific functional areas in the
system must include at least the following:

(a) Management
structure;

(b) Performance
accountability;

(c) Delivery of
educational services, including instructional materials;

(d) Administrative and
educational technology;

(e) Personnel systems
and benefits management;

(f) Facilities
construction, including use of state and district construction funds;

(g) Facilities
maintenance;

(h) Student
transportation;

(i) Food service
operations;

(j) Cost control
systems, including asset management, risk management, financial management,
purchasing, internal auditing, and financial auditing;

(k) Safety and
security; and

(l) Community
involvement.

(2) In designing the
evaluation system, the committee shall consult with the appropriate committees
of the legislature, the state auditor, the office of financial management, the
office of the superintendent of public instruction, the state board of
education, educational service districts, and other appropriate community and
educational organizations.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
3. Sections 1 and 2 of this
act constitute a new chapter in Title 28A RCW.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
4. A new section is added
to chapter 44.28 RCW to read as follows:

The joint
committee, with the assistance of the state auditor, shall design a system that
can be used to evaluate whether a school district is employing best financial
management practices and shall conduct reviews of school district financial
management practices as provided in chapter 28A.--- RCW (sections 1 and 2 of this
act).

---
END ---