BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF
WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1. RCW 13.40.050 and 1997 c
338 s 15 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) When a juvenile
taken into custody is held in detention:

(a) An information, a
community supervision modification or termination of diversion petition, or a
parole modification petition shall be filed within seventy-two hours,
Saturdays, Sundays, and holidays excluded, or the juvenile shall be released;
and

(b) A detention
hearing, a community supervision modification or termination of diversion
petition, or a parole modification petition shall be held within seventy-two
hours, Saturdays, Sundays, and holidays excluded, from the time of filing the
information or petition, to determine whether continued detention is necessary
under RCW 13.40.040.

(2)(a) Notice of
the detention hearing, stating the time, place, and purpose of the hearing,
stating the right to counsel, and requiring attendance shall be given to the
parent, guardian, or custodian if such person can be found and shall also be
given to the juvenile if over twelve years of age.

(b) Notice of the
detention hearing shall also be given to the juvenile's school if the offense,
violation of a disposition order, or violation of a release order: (i)
Involves an employee or student at the juvenile's school; (ii) involves school
property; or (iii) pertains to the juvenile's attendance at the school.

(3) At the commencement
of the detention hearing, the court shall advise the parties of their rights
under this chapter and shall appoint counsel as specified in this chapter.

(4) The court shall,
based upon the allegations in the information, determine whether the case is
properly before it or whether the case should be treated as a diversion case
under RCW 13.40.080. If the case is not properly before the court the juvenile
shall be ordered released.

(5) Notwithstanding a
determination that the case is properly before the court and that probable
cause exists, a juvenile shall at the detention hearing be ordered released on
the juvenile's personal recognizance pending further hearing unless the court
finds detention is necessary under RCW 13.40.040.

(6) If detention is not
necessary under RCW 13.40.040, the court shall impose the most appropriate of
the following conditions or, if necessary, any combination of the following
conditions:

(a) Place the juvenile
in the custody of a designated person agreeing to supervise such juvenile;

(b) Place restrictions
on the travel of the juvenile during the period of release;

(c) Require the
juvenile to report regularly to and remain under the supervision of the
juvenile court;

(d) Impose any
condition other than detention deemed reasonably necessary to assure appearance
as required;

(e) Require that the
juvenile return to detention during specified hours; or

(f) Require the
juvenile to post a probation bond set by the court under terms and conditions
as provided in RCW 13.40.040(4).

(7) A juvenile may be
released only to a responsible adult or the department.

(8) If the parent,
guardian, or custodian of the juvenile in detention is available, the court
shall consult with them prior to a determination to further detain or release
the juvenile or treat the case as a diversion case under RCW 13.40.080.

(9) Except for
persons notified under subsection (2)(b) of this section, a person notified
under this section who fails without reasonable cause to appear and abide by
the order of the court may be proceeded against as for contempt of court. In
determining whether a parent, guardian, or custodian had reasonable cause not
to appear, the court may consider all factors relevant to the person's ability
to appear as summoned.

Sec. 2. RCW 13.40.150 and 1998 c
86 s 1 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) In disposition
hearings all relevant and material evidence, including oral and written
reports, may be received by the court and may be relied upon to the extent of
its probative value, even though such evidence may not be admissible in a
hearing on the information. The youth or the youth's counsel and the
prosecuting attorney shall be afforded an opportunity to examine and controvert
written reports so received and to cross-examine individuals making reports
when such individuals are reasonably available, but sources of confidential
information need not be disclosed. The prosecutor and counsel for the juvenile
may submit recommendations for disposition.

(2) For purposes of
disposition:

(a) Violations which
are current offenses count as misdemeanors;

(b) Violations may not
count as part of the offender's criminal history;

(c) In no event may a
disposition for a violation include confinement.

(3) Before entering a
dispositional order as to a respondent found to have committed an offense, the
court shall hold a disposition hearing, at which the court shall:

(a) Consider the facts
supporting the allegations of criminal conduct by the respondent;

(b) Consider
information and arguments offered by parties and their counsel;

(c) Consider any
predisposition reports;

(d) Consult with the
respondent's parent, guardian, or custodian on the appropriateness of
dispositional options under consideration and afford the respondent and the
respondent's parent, guardian, or custodian an opportunity to speak in the
respondent's behalf;

(e) Allow the victim or
a representative of the victim and an investigative law enforcement officer to
speak;

(f) Consider
recommendations and concerns from the juvenile's school when imposing
monitoring and reporting requirements, sanctions, or other dispositional
conditions relating to the juvenile's school attendance;

(g) Determine
the amount of restitution owing to the victim, if any, or set a hearing for a
later date not to exceed one hundred eighty days from the date of the
disposition hearing to determine the amount, except that the court may continue
the hearing beyond the one hundred eighty days for good cause;

(((g))) (h)
Determine the respondent's offender score;

(((h))) (i)
Consider whether or not any of the following mitigating factors exist:

(i) The respondent's
conduct neither caused nor threatened serious bodily injury or the respondent
did not contemplate that his or her conduct would cause or threaten serious
bodily injury;

(ii) The respondent
acted under strong and immediate provocation;

(iii) The respondent
was suffering from a mental or physical condition that significantly reduced
his or her culpability for the offense though failing to establish a defense;

(iv) Prior to his or
her detection, the respondent compensated or made a good faith attempt to
compensate the victim for the injury or loss sustained; and

(v) There has been at
least one year between the respondent's current offense and any prior criminal
offense;

(((i))) (j)
Consider whether or not any of the following aggravating factors exist:

(i) In the commission
of the offense, or in flight therefrom, the respondent inflicted or attempted
to inflict serious bodily injury to another;

(ii) The offense was
committed in an especially heinous, cruel, or depraved manner;

(iii) The victim or
victims were particularly vulnerable;

(iv) The respondent has
a recent criminal history or has failed to comply with conditions of a recent
dispositional order or diversion agreement;

(v) The current offense
included a finding of sexual motivation pursuant to RCW 13.40.135;

(vi) The respondent was
the leader of a criminal enterprise involving several persons;

(vii) There are other
complaints which have resulted in diversion or a finding or plea of guilty but
which are not included as criminal history; and

(viii) The standard
range disposition is clearly too lenient considering the seriousness of the
juvenile's prior adjudications.

(4) The following factors
may not be considered in determining the punishment to be imposed:

(a) The sex of the
respondent;

(b) The race or color
of the respondent or the respondent's family;

(c) The creed or
religion of the respondent or the respondent's family;

(d) The economic or
social class of the respondent or the respondent's family; and

(e) Factors indicating
that the respondent may be or is a dependent child within the meaning of this
chapter.

(5) A court may not
commit a juvenile to a state institution solely because of the lack of
facilities, including treatment facilities, existing in the community.

Sec. 3. RCW 26.50.050 and 1995 c
246 s 6 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) Upon receipt
of the petition, the court shall order a hearing which shall be held not later
than fourteen days from the date of the order. The court may schedule a
hearing by telephone pursuant to local court rule, to reasonably accommodate a
disability, or in exceptional circumstances to protect a petitioner from
further acts of domestic violence. The court shall require assurances of the
petitioner's identity before conducting a telephonic hearing. Except as
provided in RCW 26.50.085 and 26.50.123, personal service shall be made upon
the respondent not less than five court days prior to the hearing. If timely
personal service cannot be made, the court shall set a new hearing date and
shall either require additional attempts at obtaining personal service or
permit service by publication as provided in RCW 26.50.085 or service by mail
as provided in RCW 26.50.123. If the court permits service by publication or
by mail, the court shall set the hearing date not later than twenty-four days
from the date of the order. The court may issue an ex parte order for
protection pending the hearing as provided in RCW 26.50.070, 26.50.085, and
26.50.123.

(2) If, based on the
petition, the court determines that the petitioner and the respondent attend
the same school, the court shall send a copy of the petition and notice of the
hearing to the school.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
4. A new section is added
to chapter 26.50 RCW to read as follows:

(1) If the petitioner
and the respondent attend the same school, the court, in providing relief under
this chapter, shall consider the recommendations and concerns raised, prior to
or at the time of the hearing, by the school.

(2) When a court enters
an order under this chapter, other than an ex parte temporary order for
protection under RCW 26.50.070, and the petitioner and the respondent attend
the same school, the court shall send a copy of the order to the school.

Sec. 5. RCW 10.14.070 and 1992 c
143 s 10 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) Upon receipt
of the petition, the court shall order a hearing which shall be held not later
than fourteen days from the date of the order. Except as provided in RCW
10.14.085, personal service shall be made upon the respondent not less than
five court days before the hearing. If timely personal service cannot be made,
the court shall set a new hearing date and shall either require additional
attempts at obtaining personal service or permit service by publication as
provided by RCW 10.14.085. If the court permits service by publication, the
court shall set the hearing date not later than twenty-four days from the date
of the order. The court may issue an ex parte order for protection pending the
hearing as provided in RCW 10.14.080 and 10.14.085.

(2) If, based on the
petition, the court determines that the petitioner and the respondent attend
the same school, the court shall send a copy of the petition and notice of the
hearing to the school.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
6. A new section is added
to chapter 10.14 RCW to read as follows:

(1) If the petitioner
and the respondent attend the same school, the court, in providing relief under
this chapter, shall consider the recommendations and concerns raised, prior to
or at the time of the hearing, by the school.

(2) When a
court enters an order under this chapter, other than an ex parte temporary
order, and the petitioner and the respondent attend the same school, the court
shall send a copy of the order to the school.

---
END ---