BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF
WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1. RCW 13.50.050 and 1999 c
198 s 4 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) This section
governs records relating to the commission of juvenile offenses, including
records relating to diversions.

(2) The official
juvenile court file of any alleged or proven juvenile offender shall be open to
public inspection, unless sealed pursuant to subsection (12) of this section.

(3) All records other
than the official juvenile court file are confidential and may be released only
as provided in this section, RCW 13.50.010, 13.40.215, and 4.24.550.

(4) Except as otherwise
provided in this section and RCW 13.50.010, records retained or produced by any
juvenile justice or care agency may be released to other participants in the
juvenile justice or care system only when an investigation or case involving
the juvenile in question is being pursued by the other participant or when that
other participant is assigned the responsibility for supervising the juvenile.

(5) Except as provided
in RCW 4.24.550, information not in an official juvenile court file concerning
a juvenile or a juvenile's family may be released to the public only when that
information could not reasonably be expected to identify the juvenile or the
juvenile's family.

(6) Notwithstanding any
other provision of this chapter, the release, to the juvenile or his or her
attorney, of law enforcement and prosecuting attorneys' records pertaining to
investigation, diversion, and prosecution of juvenile offenses shall be
governed by the rules of discovery and other rules of law applicable in adult
criminal investigations and prosecutions.

(7)(a) Upon the
decision to arrest or the arrest, law enforcement and prosecuting attorneys may
cooperate with schools in releasing information to a school pertaining to the
investigation, diversion, and prosecution of a juvenile attending the school.
Upon the decision to arrest or the arrest, incident reports may be released
unless releasing the records would jeopardize the investigation or prosecution
or endanger witnesses. If release of incident reports would jeopardize the
investigation or prosecution or endanger witnesses, law enforcement and
prosecuting attorneys may release information to the maximum extent possible to
assist schools in protecting other students, staff, and school property.

(b) Upon the
decision to arrest or an arrest, and upon the request by the school, law
enforcement shall release information, including incident reports, to the
school pertaining to the investigation, diversion, or prosecution of a juvenile
attending the school if: (i) The victim of the alleged offense is an employee
or student at the school and the alleged offense occurred on school property or
under school supervision; or (ii) the alleged offense involves school
property. However, if release of an incident report under this subsection
would jeopardize the investigation or prosecution or endanger witnesses, law
enforcement shall release information to the extent possible to assist schools
in protecting other students, staff, and school property.

(c) The school may
use the information provided under this section only for the purposes of
formulating or amending an educational plan for the student or investigating
misconduct for which discipline, suspension, or expulsion action may be imposed
in compliance with the school's rules and procedures.

(8) The juvenile court
and the prosecutor may set up and maintain a central record-keeping system which
may receive information on all alleged juvenile offenders against whom a
complaint has been filed pursuant to RCW 13.40.070 whether or not their cases
are currently pending before the court. The central record-keeping system may
be computerized. If a complaint has been referred to a diversion unit, the
diversion unit shall promptly report to the juvenile court or the prosecuting
attorney when the juvenile has agreed to diversion. An offense shall not be
reported as criminal history in any central record-keeping system without
notification by the diversion unit of the date on which the offender agreed to
diversion.

(9) Upon request of the
victim of a crime or the victim's immediate family, the identity of an alleged
or proven juvenile offender alleged or found to have committed a crime against
the victim and the identity of the alleged or proven juvenile offender's
parent, guardian, or custodian and the circumstance of the alleged or proven
crime shall be released to the victim of the crime or the victim's immediate
family.

(10) Subject to the
rules of discovery applicable in adult criminal prosecutions, the juvenile
offense records of an adult criminal defendant or witness in an adult criminal
proceeding shall be released upon request to prosecution and defense counsel
after a charge has actually been filed. The juvenile offense records of any
adult convicted of a crime and placed under the supervision of the adult
corrections system shall be released upon request to the adult corrections
system.

(11) In any case in
which an information has been filed pursuant to RCW 13.40.100 or a complaint
has been filed with the prosecutor and referred for diversion pursuant to RCW
13.40.070, the person the subject of the information or complaint may file a
motion with the court to have the court vacate its order and findings, if any,
and, subject to subsection (23) of this section, order the sealing of the
official juvenile court file, the social file, and records of the court and of
any other agency in the case.

(12) The court shall
grant the motion to seal records made pursuant to subsection (11) of this
section if it finds that:

(a) For class B
offenses other than sex offenses, since the last date of release from
confinement, including full-time residential treatment, if any, or entry of
disposition, the person has spent ten consecutive years in the community
without committing any offense or crime that subsequently results in
conviction. For class C offenses other than sex offenses, since the last date
of release from confinement, including full-time residential treatment, if any,
or entry of disposition, the person has spent five consecutive years in the
community without committing any offense or crime that subsequently results in
conviction;

(b) No proceeding is
pending against the moving party seeking the conviction of a juvenile offense
or a criminal offense;

(c) No proceeding is
pending seeking the formation of a diversion agreement with that person;

(d) The person has not
been convicted of a class A or sex offense; and

(e) Full restitution
has been paid.

(13) The person making
a motion pursuant to subsection (11) of this section shall give reasonable
notice of the motion to the prosecution and to any person or agency whose files
are sought to be sealed.

(14) If the court
grants the motion to seal made pursuant to subsection (11) of this section, it
shall, subject to subsection (23) of this section, order sealed the official
juvenile court file, the social file, and other records relating to the case as
are named in the order. Thereafter, the proceedings in the case shall be
treated as if they never occurred, and the subject of the records may reply
accordingly to any inquiry about the events, records of which are sealed. Any
agency shall reply to any inquiry concerning confidential or sealed records
that records are confidential, and no information can be given about the
existence or nonexistence of records concerning an individual.

(15) Inspection of the
files and records included in the order to seal may thereafter be permitted
only by order of the court upon motion made by the person who is the subject of
the information or complaint, except as otherwise provided in RCW 13.50.010(8)
and subsection (23) of this section.

(16) Any adjudication
of a juvenile offense or a crime subsequent to sealing has the effect of
nullifying the sealing order. Any charging of an adult felony subsequent to
the sealing has the effect of nullifying the sealing order for the purposes of
chapter 9.94A RCW.

(17) A person eighteen
years of age or older whose criminal history consists of only one referral for
diversion may request that the court order the records in that case destroyed.
The request shall be granted, subject to subsection (23) of this section, if
the court finds that two years have elapsed since completion of the diversion
agreement.

(18) If the court
grants the motion to destroy records made pursuant to subsection (17) of this
section, it shall, subject to subsection (23) of this section, order the
official juvenile court file, the social file, and any other records named in
the order to be destroyed.

(19) The person making
the motion pursuant to subsection (17) of this section shall give reasonable
notice of the motion to the prosecuting attorney and to any agency whose
records are sought to be destroyed.

(20) Any juvenile to
whom the provisions of this section may apply shall be given written notice of
his or her rights under this section at the time of his or her disposition
hearing or during the diversion process.

(21) Nothing in this
section may be construed to prevent a crime victim or a member of the victim's
family from divulging the identity of the alleged or proven juvenile offender
or his or her family when necessary in a civil proceeding.

(22) Any juvenile
justice or care agency may, subject to the limitations in subsection (23) of
this section and (a) and (b) of this subsection, develop procedures for the
routine destruction of records relating to juvenile offenses and diversions.

(a) Records may be
routinely destroyed only when the person the subject of the information or
complaint has attained twenty-three years of age or older, or is eighteen years
of age or older and his or her criminal history consists entirely of one
diversion agreement and two years have passed since completion of the
agreement.

(b) The court may not
routinely destroy the official juvenile court file or recordings or transcripts
of any proceedings.

(23) No identifying
information held by the Washington state patrol in accordance with chapter
43.43 RCW is subject to destruction or sealing under this section. For the
purposes of this subsection, identifying information includes photographs,
fingerprints, palmprints, soleprints, toeprints and any other data that
identifies a person by physical characteristics, name, birthdate or address,
but does not include information regarding criminal activity, arrest, charging,
diversion, conviction or other information about a person's treatment by the
criminal justice system or about the person's behavior.

(24)
Information identifying child victims under age eighteen who are victims of
sexual assaults by juvenile offenders is confidential and not subject to
release to the press or public without the permission of the child victim or
the child's legal guardian. Identifying information includes the child
victim's name, addresses, location, photographs, and in cases in which the
child victim is a relative of the alleged perpetrator, identification of the
relationship between the child and the alleged perpetrator. Information
identifying a child victim of sexual assault may be released to law
enforcement, prosecutors, judges, defense attorneys, or private or governmental
agencies that provide services to the child victim of sexual assault.

--- END ---