BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF
WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1. RCW 46.16.0621 and 2000
1st sp.s. c 1 s 1 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) License tab fees
shall be thirty dollars per year for motor vehicles, regardless of year, value,
make, or model, beginning January 1, 2000.

(2) On all new and
renewal license fees, an additional fifty cents must be collected and remitted
to the department for deposit into the department of licensing services account
of the motor vehicle fund for agent and subagent support, which is to include the
replacement of department-owned equipment in the possession of agents and
subagents.

(3) For the
purposes of this section, "license tab fees" are defined as the
general fees paid annually for licensing motor vehicles, including cars, sport
utility vehicles, motorcycles, and motor homes.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 2. This act takes effect
August 1, 2001, and applies to vehicle registration fees as they are due or
become due.

---
END ---