BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF
WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1. RCW 71A.16.010 and 1998
c 216 s 3 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) It is the intention
of the legislature in this chapter to establish a single point of referral for
persons with developmental disabilities and their families so that they may
have a place of entry and continuing contact for services authorized under this
title to persons with developmental disabilities. Eligible persons with
developmental disabilities, whether they live in the community or residential
habilitation centers, should have the opportunity to choose where they live.

(2) Until June 30,
2003, and subject to subsection (3) of this section, if there is a vacancy in a
residential habilitation center, the department shall offer admittance to the
center to any eligible adult, or eligible adolescent on an exceptional
case-by-case basis, with developmental disabilities if his or her assessed
needs require the funded level of resources that are provided by the center.

(3) The department
shall not offer a person admittance to a residential habilitation center under
subsection (2) of this section unless the department also offers the person
appropriate community support services listed in RCW 71A.12.040.

(4) ((Community
support services offered under subsection (3) of this section may only be
offered using funds specifically designated for this purpose in the state
operating budget. When these funds are exhausted, the department may not offer
admittance to a residential habilitation center, or community support services
under this section.

(5))) Nothing in this section shall be construed to
create an entitlement to state services for persons with developmental
disabilities.

(((6)))
(5) Subsections (2) through (((6))) (5) of this section
expire June 30, 2003.

--- END ---