BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF
WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1. RCW 69.50.505 and 1993 c
487 s 1 are each amended to read as follows:

(a) The following are
subject to seizure and forfeiture and no property right exists in them:

(1) All controlled
substances which have been manufactured, distributed, dispensed, acquired, or
possessed in violation of this chapter or chapter 69.41 or 69.52 RCW, and all
hazardous chemicals, as defined in RCW 64.44.010, used or intended to be used
in the manufacture of controlled substances;

(2) All raw materials,
products, and equipment of any kind which are used, or intended for use, in
manufacturing, compounding, processing, delivering, importing, or exporting any
controlled substance in violation of this chapter or chapter 69.41 or 69.52
RCW;

(3) All property which
is used, or intended for use, as a container for property described in paragraphs
(1) or (2);

(4) All conveyances,
including aircraft, vehicles, or vessels, which are used, or intended for use,
in any manner to facilitate the sale, delivery, or receipt of property
described in paragraphs (1) or (2), except that:

(i) No conveyance used
by any person as a common carrier in the transaction of business as a common
carrier is subject to forfeiture under this section unless it appears that the
owner or other person in charge of the conveyance is a consenting party or
privy to a violation of this chapter or chapter 69.41 or 69.52 RCW;

(ii) No conveyance is
subject to forfeiture under this section by reason of any act or omission
established by the owner thereof to have been committed or omitted without the
owner's knowledge or consent;

(iii) No conveyance is
subject to forfeiture under this section if used in the receipt of only an
amount of marijuana for which possession constitutes a misdemeanor under RCW
69.50.401(e);

(iv) A forfeiture of a
conveyance encumbered by a bona fide security interest is subject to the
interest of the secured party if the secured party neither had knowledge of nor
consented to the act or omission; and

(v) When the owner of a
conveyance has been arrested under this chapter or chapter 69.41 or 69.52 RCW
the conveyance in which the person is arrested may not be subject to forfeiture
unless it is seized or process is issued for its seizure within ten days of the
owner's arrest;

(5) All books, records,
and research products and materials, including formulas, microfilm, tapes, and
data which are used, or intended for use, in violation of this chapter or
chapter 69.41 or 69.52 RCW;

(6) All drug
paraphernalia;

(7) All moneys,
negotiable instruments, securities, or other tangible or intangible property of
value furnished or intended to be furnished by any person in exchange for a
controlled substance in violation of this chapter or chapter 69.41 or 69.52
RCW, all tangible or intangible personal property, proceeds, or assets acquired
in whole or in part with proceeds traceable to an exchange or series of
exchanges in violation of this chapter or chapter 69.41 or 69.52 RCW, and all
moneys, negotiable instruments, and securities used or intended to be used to
facilitate any violation of this chapter or chapter 69.41 or 69.52 RCW. A
forfeiture of money, negotiable instruments, securities, or other tangible or
intangible property encumbered by a bona fide security interest is subject to
the interest of the secured party if, at the time the security interest was
created, the secured party neither had knowledge of nor consented to the act or
omission. No personal property may be forfeited under this paragraph, to the
extent of the interest of an owner, by reason of any act or omission which that
owner establishes was committed or omitted without the owner's knowledge or
consent; and

(8) All real property,
including any right, title, and interest in the whole of any lot or tract of
land, and any appurtenances or improvements which are being used with the
knowledge of the owner for the manufacturing, compounding, processing,
delivery, importing, or exporting of any controlled substance, or which have
been acquired in whole or in part with proceeds traceable to an exchange or
series of exchanges in violation of this chapter or chapter 69.41 or 69.52 RCW,
if such activity is not less than a class C felony and a substantial nexus
exists between the commercial production or sale of the controlled substance
and the real property. However:

(i) No property may be
forfeited pursuant to this subsection, to the extent of the interest of an
owner, by reason of any act or omission committed or omitted without the
owner's knowledge or consent;

(ii) The bona fide gift
of a controlled substance, legend drug, or imitation controlled substance shall
not result in the forfeiture of real property;

(iii) The possession of
marijuana shall not result in the forfeiture of real property unless the
marijuana is possessed for commercial purposes, the amount possessed is five or
more plants or one pound or more of marijuana, and a substantial nexus exists between
the possession of marijuana and the real property. In such a case, the intent
of the offender shall be determined by the preponderance of the evidence,
including the offender's prior criminal history, the amount of marijuana
possessed by the offender, the sophistication of the activity or equipment used
by the offender, and other evidence which demonstrates the offender's intent to
engage in commercial activity;

(iv) The unlawful sale
of marijuana or a legend drug shall not result in the forfeiture of real
property unless the sale was forty grams or more in the case of marijuana or
one hundred dollars or more in the case of a legend drug, and a substantial
nexus exists between the unlawful sale and the real property; and

(v) A forfeiture of
real property encumbered by a bona fide security interest is subject to the
interest of the secured party if the secured party, at the time the security
interest was created, neither had knowledge of nor consented to the act or
omission.

(b) Real or personal
property subject to forfeiture under this chapter may be seized by any board
inspector or law enforcement officer of this state upon process issued by any
superior court having jurisdiction over the property. Seizure of real property
shall include the filing of a lis pendens by the seizing agency. Real property
seized under this section shall not be transferred or otherwise conveyed until
ninety days after seizure or until a judgment of forfeiture is entered,
whichever is later: PROVIDED, That real property seized under this section may
be transferred or conveyed to any person or entity who acquires title by
foreclosure or deed in lieu of foreclosure of a security interest. Seizure of
personal property without process may be made if:

(1) The seizure is incident
to an arrest or a search under a search warrant or an inspection under an
administrative inspection warrant;

(2) The property
subject to seizure has been the subject of a prior judgment in favor of the
state in a criminal injunction or forfeiture proceeding based upon this
chapter;

(3) A board inspector
or law enforcement officer has probable cause to believe that the property is
directly or indirectly dangerous to health or safety; or

(4) The board inspector
or law enforcement officer has probable cause to believe that the property was
used or is intended to be used in violation of this chapter.

(c) In the event of
seizure pursuant to subsection (b), proceedings for forfeiture shall be deemed
commenced by the seizure. The law enforcement agency under whose authority the
seizure was made shall cause notice to be served within fifteen days following
the seizure on the owner of the property seized and the person in charge
thereof and any person having any known right or interest therein, including any
community property interest, of the seizure and intended forfeiture of the
seized property. Service of notice of seizure of real property shall be made
according to the rules of civil procedure. However, the state may not obtain a
default judgment with respect to real property against a party who is served by
substituted service absent an affidavit stating that a good faith effort has
been made to ascertain if the defaulted party is incarcerated within the state,
and that there is no present basis to believe that the party is incarcerated
within the state. Notice of seizure in the case of property subject to a
security interest that has been perfected by filing a financing statement in
accordance with chapter ((62A.9)) 62A.9A RCW, or a certificate of
title, shall be made by service upon the secured party or the secured party's
assignee at the address shown on the financing statement or the certificate of
title. The notice of seizure in other cases may be served by any method
authorized by law or court rule including but not limited to service by
certified mail with return receipt requested. Service by mail shall be deemed
complete upon mailing within the fifteen day period following the seizure.

(d) If no person
notifies the seizing law enforcement agency in writing of the person's claim of
ownership or right to possession of items specified in subsection (a)(4),
(a)(7), or (a)(8) of this section within forty-five days of the seizure in the
case of personal property and ninety days in the case of real property, the
item seized shall be deemed forfeited. The community property interest in real
property of a person whose spouse committed a violation giving rise to seizure
of the real property may not be forfeited if the person did not participate in
the violation.

(e) If any person
notifies the seizing law enforcement agency in writing of the person's claim of
ownership or right to possession of items specified in subsection (a)(2),
(a)(3), (a)(4), (a)(5), (a)(6), (a)(7), or (a)(8) of this section within forty-five
days of the seizure in the case of personal property and ninety days in the
case of real property, the person or persons shall be afforded a reasonable
opportunity to be heard as to the claim or right. The hearing shall be before
the chief law enforcement officer of the seizing agency or the chief law
enforcement officer's designee, except where the seizing agency is a state
agency as defined in RCW 34.12.020(4), the hearing shall be before the chief
law enforcement officer of the seizing agency or an administrative law judge
appointed under chapter 34.12 RCW, except that any person asserting a claim or
right may remove the matter to a court of competent jurisdiction. Removal of
any matter involving personal property may only be accomplished according to
the rules of civil procedure. The person seeking removal of the matter must
serve process against the state, county, political subdivision, or municipality
that operates the seizing agency, and any other party of interest, in
accordance with RCW 4.28.080 or 4.92.020, within forty-five days after the
person seeking removal has notified the seizing law enforcement agency of the
person's claim of ownership or right to possession. The court to which the
matter is to be removed shall be the district court when the aggregate value of
personal property is within the jurisdictional limit set forth in RCW
3.66.020. A hearing before the seizing agency and any appeal therefrom shall
be under Title 34 RCW. ((In a court hearing between two or more claimants to
the article or articles involved, the prevailing party shall be entitled to a
judgment for costs and reasonable attorney's fees. In cases involving personal
property, the burden of producing evidence shall be upon the person claiming to
be the lawful owner or the person claiming to have the lawful right to
possession of the property.)) In all cases ((involving real
property)), the burden of ((producing evidence shall be)) proof
is upon the law enforcement agency to establish, by a preponderance of
the evidence, that the property is subject to forfeiture. ((The burden
of proof that the seized real property is subject to forfeiture shall be upon
the law enforcement agency.))

The seizing law
enforcement agency shall promptly return the article or articles to the
claimant upon a determination by the administrative law judge or court that the
claimant is the present lawful owner or is lawfully entitled to possession
thereof of items specified in subsection (a)(2), (a)(3), (a)(4), (a)(5),
(a)(6), (a)(7), or (a)(8) of this section.

(f) In any
proceeding to forfeit property under this title, where the claimant
substantially prevails, the claimant is entitled to reasonable attorneys' fees
reasonably incurred by the claimant. In addition, in a court hearing between
two or more claimants to the article or articles involved, the prevailing party
is entitled to a judgment for costs and reasonable attorneys' fees.

(g) When
property is forfeited under this chapter the board or seizing law enforcement
agency may:

(1) Retain it for
official use or upon application by any law enforcement agency of this state
release such property to such agency for the exclusive use of enforcing the
provisions of this chapter;

(2) Sell that which is
not required to be destroyed by law and which is not harmful to the public;

(3) Request the
appropriate sheriff or director of public safety to take custody of the
property and remove it for disposition in accordance with law; or

(4) Forward it to the
drug enforcement administration for disposition.

(((g))) (h)(1)
When property is forfeited, the seizing agency shall keep a record indicating
the identity of the prior owner, if known, a description of the property, the
disposition of the property, the value of the property at the time of seizure,
and the amount of proceeds realized from disposition of the property.

(2) Each seizing agency
shall retain records of forfeited property for at least seven years.

(3) Each seizing agency
shall file a report including a copy of the records of forfeited property with
the state treasurer each calendar quarter.

(4) The quarterly
report need not include a record of forfeited property that is still being held
for use as evidence during the investigation or prosecution of a case or during
the appeal from a conviction.

(((h))) (i)(1)
By January 31st of each year, each seizing agency shall remit to the state
treasurer an amount equal to ten percent of the net proceeds of any property
forfeited during the preceding calendar year. Money remitted shall be
deposited in the violence reduction and drug enforcement ((and
education)) account under RCW 69.50.520.

(2) The net proceeds of
forfeited property is the value of the forfeitable interest in the property
after deducting the cost of satisfying any bona fide security interest to which
the property is subject at the time of seizure; and in the case of sold
property, after deducting the cost of sale, including reasonable fees or
commissions paid to independent selling agents, and the cost of any valid
landlord's claim for damages under subsection (((n))) (o) of this
section.

(3) The value of sold
forfeited property is the sale price. The value of retained forfeited property
is the fair market value of the property at the time of seizure, determined
when possible by reference to an applicable commonly used index, such as the
index used by the department of licensing for valuation of motor vehicles. A
seizing agency may use, but need not use, an independent qualified appraiser to
determine the value of retained property. If an appraiser is used, the value
of the property appraised is net of the cost of the appraisal. The value of
destroyed property and retained firearms or illegal property is zero.

(((i))) (j)
Forfeited property and net proceeds not required to be paid to the state
treasurer shall be retained by the seizing law enforcement agency exclusively
for the expansion and improvement of controlled substances related law
enforcement activity. Money retained under this section may not be used to
supplant preexisting funding sources.

(((j))) (k)
Controlled substances listed in Schedule I, II, III, IV, and V that are
possessed, transferred, sold, or offered for sale in violation of this chapter
are contraband and shall be seized and summarily forfeited to the state.
Controlled substances listed in Schedule I, II, III, IV, and V, which are
seized or come into the possession of the board, the owners of which are
unknown, are contraband and shall be summarily forfeited to the board.

(((k))) (l)
Species of plants from which controlled substances in Schedules I and II may be
derived which have been planted or cultivated in violation of this chapter, or
of which the owners or cultivators are unknown, or which are wild growths, may
be seized and summarily forfeited to the board.

(((l))) (m)
The failure, upon demand by a board inspector or law enforcement officer, of
the person in occupancy or in control of land or premises upon which the
species of plants are growing or being stored to produce an appropriate
registration or proof that he is the holder thereof constitutes authority for
the seizure and forfeiture of the plants.

(((m))) (n)
Upon the entry of an order of forfeiture of real property, the court shall forward
a copy of the order to the assessor of the county in which the property is
located. Orders for the forfeiture of real property shall be entered by the
superior court, subject to court rules. Such an order shall be filed by the
seizing agency in the county auditor's records in the county in which the real
property is located.

(((n))) (o)
A landlord may assert a claim against proceeds from the sale of assets seized
and forfeited under subsection (((f))) (g)(2) of this section,
only if:

(l) A law enforcement
officer, while acting in his or her official capacity, directly caused damage
to the complaining landlord's property while executing a search of a tenant's
residence; and

(2) The landlord has
applied any funds remaining in the tenant's deposit, to which the landlord has
a right under chapter 59.18 RCW, to cover the damage directly caused by a law
enforcement officer prior to asserting a claim under the provisions of this
section;

(i) Only if the funds
applied under (2) of this subsection are insufficient to satisfy the damage
directly caused by a law enforcement officer, may the landlord seek
compensation for the damage by filing a claim against the governmental entity
under whose authority the law enforcement agency operates within thirty days after
the search;

(ii) Only if the
governmental entity denies or fails to respond to the landlord's claim within
sixty days of the date of filing, may the landlord collect damages under this
subsection by filing within thirty days of denial or the expiration of the
sixty-day period, whichever occurs first, a claim with the seizing law
enforcement agency. The seizing law enforcement agency must notify the
landlord of the status of the claim by the end of the thirty-day period.
Nothing in this section requires the claim to be paid by the end of the
sixty-day or thirty-day period.

(3) For any claim filed
under (2) of this subsection, the law enforcement agency shall pay the claim
unless the agency provides substantial proof that the landlord either:

(i) Knew or consented
to actions of the tenant in violation of this chapter or chapter 69.41 or 69.52
RCW; or

(ii) Failed to respond
to a notification of the illegal activity, provided by a law enforcement agency
under RCW 59.18.075, within seven days of receipt of notification of the
illegal activity.

(((o))) (p)
The landlord's claim for damages under subsection (((n))) (o) of
this section may not include a claim for loss of business and is limited to:

(1) Damage to tangible
property and clean-up costs;

(2) The lesser of the
cost of repair or fair market value of the damage directly caused by a law
enforcement officer;

(3) The proceeds from
the sale of the specific tenant's property seized and forfeited under
subsection (((f))) (g)(2) of this section; and

(4) The proceeds
available after the seizing law enforcement agency satisfies any bona fide
security interest in the tenant's property and costs related to sale of the
tenant's property as provided by subsection (((h))) (i)(2) of
this section.

(((p))) (q)
Subsections (((n))) (o) and (((o))) (p) of this
section do not limit any other rights a landlord may have against a tenant to
collect for damages. However, if a law enforcement agency satisfies a
landlord's claim under subsection (((n))) (o) of this section,
the rights the landlord has against the tenant for damages directly caused by a
law enforcement officer under the terms of the landlord and tenant's contract
are subrogated to the law enforcement agency.

Sec. 2. RCW 9A.83.030 and 1992 c
210 s 3 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) Proceeds traceable
to or derived from specified unlawful activity or a violation of RCW 9A.83.020
are subject to seizure and forfeiture. The attorney general or county
prosecuting attorney may file a civil action for the forfeiture of proceeds.
Unless otherwise provided for under this section, no property rights exist in
these proceeds. All right, title, and interest in the proceeds shall vest in
the governmental entity of which the seizing law enforcement agency is a part
upon commission of the act or omission giving rise to forfeiture under this
section.

(2) Real or personal
property subject to forfeiture under this chapter may be seized by any law
enforcement officer of this state upon process issued by a superior court that
has jurisdiction over the property. Any agency seizing real property shall
file a lis pendens concerning the property. Real property seized under this
section shall not be transferred or otherwise conveyed until ninety days after
seizure or until a judgment of forfeiture is entered, whichever is later. Real
property seized under this section may be transferred or conveyed to any person
or entity who acquires title by foreclosure or deed in lieu of foreclosure of a
security interest. Seizure of personal property without process may be made
if:

(a) The seizure is
incident to an arrest or a search under a search warrant or an inspection under
an administrative inspection warrant issued pursuant to RCW 69.50.502; or

(b) The property
subject to seizure has been the subject of a prior judgment in favor of the
state in a criminal injunction or forfeiture proceeding based upon this
chapter.

(3) A seizure under
subsection (2) of this section commences proceedings for forfeiture. The law
enforcement agency under whose authority the seizure was made shall cause
notice of the seizure and intended forfeiture of the seized proceeds to be
served within fifteen days after the seizure on the owner of the property
seized and the person in charge thereof and any person who has a known right or
interest therein, including a community property interest. Service of notice
of seizure of real property shall be made according to the rules of civil
procedure. However, the state may not obtain a default judgment with respect
to real property against a party who is served by substituted service absent an
affidavit stating that a good faith effort has been made to ascertain if the
defaulted party is incarcerated within the state, and that there is no present
basis to believe that the party is incarcerated within the state. The notice
of seizure in other cases may be served by any method authorized by law or court
rule including but not limited to service by certified mail with return receipt
requested. Service by mail is complete upon mailing within the fifteen-day
period after the seizure.

(4) If no person
notifies the seizing law enforcement agency in writing of the person's claim of
ownership or right to possession of the property within forty-five days of the
seizure in the case of personal property and ninety days in the case of real
property, the property seized shall be deemed forfeited. The community property
interest in real property of a person whose spouse committed a violation giving
rise to seizure of the real property may not be forfeited if the person did not
participate in the violation.

(5) If a person
notifies the seizing law enforcement agency in writing of the person's claim of
ownership or right to possession of property within forty-five days of the
seizure in the case of personal property and ninety days in the case of real
property, the person or persons shall be afforded a reasonable opportunity to
be heard as to the claim or right. The provisions of RCW 69.50.505(e) shall
apply to any such hearing. The seizing law enforcement agency shall promptly
return property to the claimant upon the direction of the administrative law
judge or court.

(6) Disposition of
forfeited property shall be made in the manner provided for in RCW 69.50.505 (((g)))
(h) through (((i))) (j) and (((m))) (n).

Sec. 3. RCW 69.50.520 and 2000
2nd sp.s. c 1 s 917 are each amended to read as follows:

The violence reduction
and drug enforcement account is created in the state treasury. All designated
receipts from RCW 9.41.110(8), 66.24.210(4), 66.24.290(2), 69.50.505(((h)))
(i)(1), 82.08.150(5), 82.24.020(2), 82.64.020, and section 420, chapter
271, Laws of 1989 shall be deposited into the account. Expenditures from the
account may be used only for funding services and programs under chapter 271,
Laws of 1989 and chapter 7, Laws of 1994 sp. sess., including state
incarceration costs. Funds from the account may also be appropriated to
reimburse local governments for costs associated with implementing criminal
justice legislation including chapter 338, Laws of 1997. During the 1999-2001
biennium, funds from the account may also be used for costs associated with
providing grants to local governments in accordance with chapter 338, Laws of
1997, the design, sitework, and construction of the special commitment center,
the replacement of the department of corrections' offender-based tracking system,
and for multijurisdictional narcotics task forces. After July 1, 2001, at
least seven and one-half percent of expenditures from the account shall be used
for providing grants to community networks under chapter 70.190 RCW by the
family policy council.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
4. (1) The senate and house
of representatives judiciary committees shall convene a workgroup to evaluate
Washington civil forfeiture laws and practices. The efforts of the workgroup
shall include: An evaluation of the enacted changes to the federal civil
forfeiture act and how they compare to current Washington law; an analysis of
whether a requirement for a criminal conviction before civil forfeiture would
raise additional constitutional issues; a comprehensive review of every civil
forfeiture case that took place in Washington state under state law during the
year 2000; a discussion of recommendations and issues in the Washington civil
forfeiture statutes, including issues upon which the workgroup can agree and
those that remain in dispute; and any other civil forfeiture issues identified
by the workgroup during its deliberations.

(2) The workgroup shall
consist of sixteen members. Four members shall be from the senate, two from
each caucus to be appointed by the president of the senate, and four members
shall be from the house of representatives, two from each caucus to be
appointed by the co-speakers of the house of representatives. The American
civil liberties union, the Washington association of sheriffs and police
chiefs, the Washington association of prosecuting attorneys, and the Washington
association of criminal defense lawyers may appoint two representatives each to
participate in the workgroup.

(3) The members of the
legislature appointed to the workgroup shall be paid by the legislature under
chapter 44.04 RCW. Support staff for the workgroup shall be provided by the
senate committee services and the office of program research.

(4) The workgroup shall
submit its findings and recommendations to the senate judiciary committee and
house of representatives judiciary committee not later than December 1, 2001.
The workgroup shall terminate on December 15, 2001.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 5. If any provision of this
act or its application to any person or circumstance is held invalid, the
remainder of the act or the application of the provision to other persons or
circumstances is not affected.

---
END ---