BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF
WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec.
1. The legislature finds
that the practice of selling petroleum below cost in order to attract patronage
is generally a form of deceptive advertising and an unfair method of
competition in commerce. This practice causes commercial dislocations, misleads
the consumer, directly burdens and obstructs commerce, and diverts business
from dealers who maintain a fair price policy. Bankruptcies among merchants
who fail because of the competition of those who use such methods result in
unemployment, disruption of leases, nonpayment of taxes and loans, and
contribute to an inevitable train of undesirable consequences, including
economic depression.

The legislature also
finds that promoting fair competition in motor fuel marketing is in the public
interest, that the marketing of motor fuel has a direct impact on the citizens
of the state, and that petroleum legislation is within the police power of the
state of Washington. The legislature further finds that subsidized pricing is
inherently predatory, reduces competition in the petroleum industry, and
threatens the consuming public.

The intent of this
chapter is to level the playing field between all retail dealers of petroleum
products in order to remove unfair competitive advantages, to promote
competition on the merits at the retail level of motor fuel marketing, and to
promote a competitive environment that will not penalize efficiency in retail
marketing, but will enhance consumer choice.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
2. The definitions in this
section apply throughout this chapter unless the context clearly requires
otherwise.

(1) "Commercial
customer" includes any person, partnership, firm, broker, corporation,
joint stock company, or other business or association engaged in the purchase
or sale of motor fuel from a supplier, whether the purchase or sale is for
resale at wholesale or retail.

(2) "Motor
fuel" means all grades of gasoline, including but not limited to leaded
and unleaded gasoline and diesel fuel of a type distributed for use in
self-propelled motor vehicles, and includes gasohol.

(3) "Motor fuel
cost" means the product cost, plus the nonproduct cost.

(4) "Nonproduct
cost" means the occupancy cost and operational expenses attributable to
the retail sale of motor fuel by the retail dealer.

(5) "Nonretail
dealer supplier" means a person engaged in the supply or distribution of
motor fuel for sale or delivery to a motor fuel dealer.

(6) "Occupancy
cost" means the reasonable rental value of the retail outlet determined as
the fair market rental value of the land, improvements, and equipment at the
retail outlet, as well as the real and personal property taxes, utilities, any
related fees and permit costs, and insurance related to the retail sale of
motor fuel by the retail dealer.

(7) "Operational
cost" means all personnel expenses attributable to the sale of motor fuel
by the retail dealer, including but not limited to personnel expenses of
storing, inventorying, ordering, and selling motor fuel, hourly wage personnel
such as store clerks, salaries of managers or supervisors, workers'
compensation insurance premiums, unemployment compensation taxes, payroll
taxes, and any other applicable work force related taxes, employee benefits,
and perquisites offered to employees.

(8) "Product
cost" means the invoice cost of the motor fuel by grade to the retail
dealer, less all allowances and trade discounts actually received, plus all
applicable federal, state, and local taxes imposed on motor fuel.

(9) "Retail
dealer" includes any person, partnership, firm, corporation, joint stock
company, or other business or association engaged in the sale of motor fuel at
retail to the consuming public.

(10)
"Supplier" includes any person, partnership, firm, broker,
corporation, joint stock company, or other business or association engaged in
the sale of motor fuel to wholesale distributors, commercial customers, or
retail dealers.

(11) "Supplier
posted terminal price" means the price at which a petroleum supplier
offers to sell motor fuel to the public, including wholesale distributors and
commercial customers, at its distribution terminals or racks. If a supplier
does not have a posted terminal price, then the supplier posted terminal price
shall be the average posted terminal price at the terminal or rack located
closest to the retail station for like grade or quality, branded or unbranded,
motor fuel in the states of Washington or Oregon.

(12) "Wholesale
distributors" includes any person, partnership, firm, broker, corporation,
joint stock company, or other business or association engaged in the purchase
of motor fuel from a supplier and reselling the motor fuel to other wholesale
distributors, retail dealers, or other commercial customers, or that delivers
such a product to retail gasoline stations owned or operated by the wholesale
distributor.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
3. No retail dealer may
engage in a pattern of selling, offer to sell, or sell motor fuel below the
motor fuel cost when such a pattern of selling, offer to sell, or sale has the
effect of injuring one or more competitors or reducing competition.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
4. In all actions brought
under the provisions of this chapter, the proof of one or more acts of selling
motor fuel at a cost below the supplier posted terminal price, including
applicable federal, state, and local taxes, plus nine percent, together with
proof of the injurious effect of such act or acts is prima facie evidence of
the purpose or intent of injuring one or more competitors or reducing
competition.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
5. Injury to one or more
retail dealers, which injury is proximately caused by the below cost selling,
constitutes an adverse effect on competition and is deemed to have the effect
of reducing competition for the purposes of this chapter.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
6. This chapter is deemed
remedial in nature, and does not carry any criminal liability for defendants in
any action brought under this chapter. However, civil penalties must be
imposed in actions where the court finds unfair use of economic power being exerted
by any party found to be in violation of this chapter.

For any violation of
section 3 of this act, the court shall impose a civil penalty of no less than
five hundred dollars and no more than ten thousand dollars per day during which
the defendant is found to be in violation of section 3 of this act.

Any retail dealer who
is injured in his or her business by the commission of any act prohibited by
this chapter may bring a civil action in superior court to enjoin further
violations, to recover the actual damages sustained by him or her, or both,
together with the costs of the suit, including reasonable attorneys' fees.

In addition, all civil
liability provisions of RCW 19.86.090 are incorporated into this chapter for
the purposes of remediation or penalty against any retail dealer found in
violation of this chapter.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
7. The attorney general may
bring an action in the name of the state against any person to restrain and
prevent the doing of any act prohibited by this chapter. The prevailing party
may, in the discretion of the court, recover the costs of the action, including
reasonable attorneys' fees.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
8. In any proceeding under
this chapter, the following exceptions from liability apply:

(1) Retail dealers may
not be held liable for selling motor fuel below cost under this chapter as part
of a going out of business sale as authorized under chapter 19.178 RCW.

(2) Retail dealers may
not be held liable for selling motor fuel below cost as part of a grand opening
to introduce a new or remodeled business. However, below cost sales are not
allowed for more than fourteen calendar days and are only allowed at the site
where the new or remodeled business has been constructed or remodeled. Below
cost sales of motor fuel under this subsection that last for more than fourteen
days are a violation of this chapter and subject to remedial and civil
penalties.

(3) Retail dealers may
not be held liable under this chapter when they sell motor fuel in a good faith
effort to meet the price of another competitor in the market area where the
motor fuel is being sold, even if the retail dealer is selling below cost.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
9. This chapter may be known
and cited as the "motor fuels marketing fair competition act of
2001."

NEW SECTION. Sec.
10. This chapter shall be
liberally construed to effectuate its beneficial purposes.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
11. If any provision of this
act or its application to any person or circumstance is held invalid, the
remainder of the act or the application of the provision to other persons or
circumstances is not affected.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
12. Sections 1 through 11 of
this act constitute a new chapter in Title 19 RCW.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 13. This act is necessary for
the immediate preservation of the public peace, health, or safety, or support
of the state government and its existing public institutions, and takes effect
immediately.

---
END ---