BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF
WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec.
1. The legislature finds
that heart disease is the leading cause of death in the United States, and that
the American Heart Association estimates that two hundred twenty thousand
Americans die from sudden cardiac arrest each year. Further, the legislature
finds that a cardiac arrest victim's chance of survival drops ten percent for
every minute that passes before his or her heart is returned to normal rhythm,
that the American Heart Association recommends delivery of electric shock by a
defibrillator within five minutes of an out-of-hospital sudden cardiac arrest,
that lifesaving technology, the automated external defibrillator, has been
developed to allow trained lay rescuers to safely and effectively respond to
cardiac arrest by shocking the heart into normal rhythm, and that the state of
Washington recognized the importance of expanding the availability of such
devices by extending liability protections to those who purchase and use such
devices. Accordingly, the legislature determines that Washington's citizens
would be greatly benefited by having access to these devices in public
buildings.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
2. (1) In order to assist in
improving the survival rate of individuals who experience sudden cardiac arrest
in buildings operated by state and local governments, the department of health
shall consult with the American Heart Association, the Washington state association
of counties, the association of Washington cities, and other interested
parties, in order to gather, analyze, and present findings on the best means to
place automated external defibrillators in state and local government
buildings. The issues to be addressed include, but are not limited to, the
following:

(a) Selection of public
buildings where automated external defibrillators should be placed, with
special consideration to government buildings accessible to the public;

(b) Details of automated
external defibrillator purchase, placement, oversight, and maintenance;

(c) Integration of
automated external defibrillators with existing emergency medical services; and

(d) Initial and ongoing
training required in automated external defibrillator use and cardiopulmonary
resuscitation.

(2) The
department of health shall submit its findings in a report required by
subsection (1) of this section, along with recommendations, by December 1,
2001, to the appropriate legislative committees.

---
END ---