BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF
WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1. RCW 46.20.031 and 1999 c
6 s 7 are each amended to read as follows:

The department shall
not issue a driver's license to a person:

(1) Who is under the
age of sixteen years;

(2) Whose driving
privilege has been withheld unless and until the department may authorize the
driving privilege under RCW 46.20.311;

(3) Who has been
classified as an alcoholic, drug addict, alcohol abuser, or drug abuser by a
program approved by the department of social and health services. The
department may, however, issue a license if the person:

(a) Has been granted a
deferred prosecution under chapter 10.05 RCW; or

(b) Is satisfactorily
participating in or has successfully completed an alcohol or drug abuse
treatment program approved by the department of social and health services and
has established control of his or her alcohol or drug abuse problem;

(4) Who has previously
been adjudged to be mentally ill or insane, or to be incompetent due to a
mental disability or disease. The department shall, however, issue a license
to the person if he or she otherwise qualifies and:

(a) Has been restored
to competency by the methods provided by law; or

(b) The superior court
finds the person able to operate a motor vehicle with safety upon the highways
during such incompetency;

(5) Who has not passed
the driver's licensing examination required by RCW 46.20.120 and 46.20.305, if
applicable;

(6) Who is required
under the laws of this state to deposit proof of financial responsibility and
who has not deposited such proof;

(7) Who is unable to
safely operate a motor vehicle upon the highways due to a physical or mental
disability. The department's conclusion that a person is barred from licensing
under this subsection must be reasonable and be based upon good and substantial
evidence. This determination is subject to review by a court of competent
jurisdiction((;

(8) Who has violated
his or her written promise to appear, respond, or comply regarding a notice of
infraction issued for abandonment of a vehicle in violation of RCW 46.55.105,
unless:

(a) The court has
not notified the department of the violation;

(b) The department
has received notice from the court showing that the person has been found not
to have committed the violation of RCW 46.55.105; or

(c) The person has
paid all monetary penalties owing, including completion of community service,
and the court is satisfied that the person has made restitution as provided by
RCW 46.55.105(2))).

Sec. 2. RCW 46.20.289 and 1999 c
274 s 1 are each amended to read as follows:

The department shall
suspend all driving privileges of a person when the department receives notice
from a court under RCW 46.63.070(((5))) (6), 46.63.110(5), or
46.64.025 that the person has failed to respond to a notice of traffic
infraction, failed to appear at a requested hearing, violated a written promise
to appear in court, or has failed to comply with the terms of a notice of
traffic infraction or citation, other than for ((a notice of a violation of
RCW 46.55.105 or)) a standing, stopping, or parking violation. A
suspension under this section takes effect thirty days after the date the
department mails notice of the suspension, and remains in effect until the
department has received a certificate from the court showing that the case has
been adjudicated, and until the person meets the requirements of RCW
46.20.311. In the case of failure to respond to a traffic infraction issued
under RCW 46.55.105, the department shall suspend all driving privileges until
all penalties have been paid. A suspension under this section does not
take effect if, prior to the effective date of the suspension, the department
receives a certificate from the court showing that the case has been
adjudicated.

Sec. 3. RCW 46.20.291 and 1998 c
165 s 12 are each amended to read as follows:

The department is
authorized to suspend the license of a driver upon a showing by its records or
other sufficient evidence that the licensee:

(1) Has committed an
offense for which mandatory revocation or suspension of license is provided by
law;

(2) Has, by reckless or
unlawful operation of a motor vehicle, caused or contributed to an accident
resulting in death or injury to any person or serious property damage;

(3) Has been convicted
of offenses against traffic regulations governing the movement of vehicles, or
found to have committed traffic infractions, with such frequency as to indicate
a disrespect for traffic laws or a disregard for the safety of other persons on
the highways;

(4) Is incompetent to
drive a motor vehicle under RCW 46.20.031(3);

(5) Has failed to
respond to a notice of traffic infraction, failed to appear at a requested
hearing, violated a written promise to appear in court, or has failed to comply
with the terms of a notice of traffic infraction or citation, as provided in
RCW 46.20.289;

(6) Is subject to
suspension under RCW 46.20.305;

(7) Has committed one
of the prohibited practices relating to drivers' licenses defined in RCW ((46.20.336))
46.20.0921; ((or))

(8) Has been certified
by the department of social and health services as a person who is not in
compliance with a child support order or a residential or visitation order as
provided in RCW 74.20A.320; or

(9) Has committed an
infraction under RCW 46.55.105.

Sec. 4. RCW 46.20.311 and 2000 c
115 s 7 are each amended to read as follows:

(1)(a) The department
shall not suspend a driver's license or privilege to drive a motor vehicle on
the public highways for a fixed period of more than one year, except as
specifically permitted under RCW 46.20.267, 46.20.342, or other provision of
law. Except for a suspension under RCW 46.20.267, 46.20.289, 46.20.291(5), or
74.20A.320, whenever the license or driving privilege of any person is
suspended by reason of a conviction, a finding that a traffic infraction has
been committed, pursuant to chapter 46.29 RCW, or pursuant to RCW 46.20.291 or
46.20.308, the suspension shall remain in effect until the person gives and
thereafter maintains proof of financial responsibility for the future as
provided in chapter 46.29 RCW. If the suspension is the result of a violation
of RCW 46.61.502 or 46.61.504, the department shall determine the person's
eligibility for licensing based upon the reports provided by the alcoholism
agency or probation department designated under RCW 46.61.5056 and shall deny
reinstatement until enrollment and participation in an approved program has
been established and the person is otherwise qualified. Whenever the license
or driving privilege of any person is suspended as a result of certification of
noncompliance with a child support order under chapter 74.20A RCW or a
residential or visitation order, the suspension shall remain in effect until
the person provides a release issued by the department of social and health
services stating that the person is in compliance with the order.

(b)(i) The department
shall not issue to the person a new, duplicate, or renewal license until the
person pays a reissue fee of twenty dollars.

(ii) If the suspension
is the result of a violation of RCW 46.61.502 or 46.61.504, or is the result of
administrative action under RCW 46.20.308, the reissue fee shall be one hundred
fifty dollars.

(2)(a) Any person whose
license or privilege to drive a motor vehicle on the public highways has been
revoked, unless the revocation was for a cause which has been removed, is not
entitled to have the license or privilege renewed or restored until the
person provides evidence from the court that all penalties have been paid and
restitution has been made, and: (i) After the expiration of one year from
the date the license or privilege to drive was revoked; (ii) after the
expiration of the applicable revocation period provided by RCW 46.20.3101 or
46.61.5055; (iii) after the expiration of two years for persons convicted of vehicular
homicide; or (iv) after the expiration of the applicable revocation period
provided by RCW 46.20.265.

(b)(i) After the
expiration of the appropriate period, the person may make application for a new
license as provided by law together with a reissue fee in the amount of twenty
dollars.

(ii) If the revocation
is the result of a violation of RCW 46.20.308, 46.61.502, or 46.61.504, the
reissue fee shall be one hundred fifty dollars. If the revocation is the
result of a violation of RCW 46.61.502 or 46.61.504, the department shall
determine the person's eligibility for licensing based upon the reports
provided by the alcoholism agency or probation department designated under RCW
46.61.5056 and shall deny reissuance of a license, permit, or privilege to
drive until enrollment and participation in an approved program has been
established and the person is otherwise qualified.

(c) Except for a
revocation under RCW 46.20.265, the department shall not then issue a new
license unless it is satisfied after investigation of the driving ability of
the person that it will be safe to grant the privilege of driving a motor
vehicle on the public highways, and until the person gives and thereafter
maintains proof of financial responsibility for the future as provided in
chapter 46.29 RCW. For a revocation under RCW 46.20.265, the department shall
not issue a new license unless it is satisfied after investigation of the
driving ability of the person that it will be safe to grant that person the
privilege of driving a motor vehicle on the public highways.

(3)(a) Whenever the
driver's license of any person is suspended pursuant to Article IV of the
nonresident violators compact or RCW 46.23.020 or 46.20.289 or 46.20.291(5),
the department shall not issue to the person any new or renewal license until
the person pays a reissue fee of twenty dollars.

(b) If the suspension
is the result of a violation of the laws of this or any other state, province,
or other jurisdiction involving (i) the operation or physical control of a
motor vehicle upon the public highways while under the influence of
intoxicating liquor or drugs, or (ii) the refusal to submit to a chemical test
of the driver's blood alcohol content, the reissue fee shall be one hundred
fifty dollars.

Sec. 5. RCW 46.55.085 and 1993 c
121 s 1 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) A law enforcement
officer discovering an unauthorized vehicle left within a highway right of way
shall attach to the vehicle a readily visible notification sticker. The
sticker shall contain the following information:

(a) The date and time
the sticker was attached;

(b) The identity of the
officer;

(c) A statement that if
the vehicle is not removed within twenty-four hours from the time the sticker
is attached, the registered owner will have committed the traffic infraction
of littering--abandoned vehicle and the vehicle may be taken into custody
and stored at the owner's expense; and

(d) The address and telephone
number where additional information may be obtained.

(2) If the vehicle has
current Washington registration plates, the officer shall check the records to
learn the identity of the last owner of record. The officer or his department
shall make a reasonable effort to contact the owner by telephone in order to
give the owner the information on the notification sticker.

(3) If the vehicle is
not removed within twenty-four hours from the time the notification sticker is
attached, the law enforcement officer may take custody of the vehicle and
provide for the vehicle's removal to a place of safety. A vehicle that does
not pose a safety hazard may remain on the roadside for more than twenty-four
hours if the owner or operator is unable to remove it from the place where it
is located and so notifies law enforcement officials and requests assistance.

(4) For the purposes of
this section a place of safety includes the business location of a registered
tow truck operator.

Sec. 6. RCW 46.55.105 and 1999 c
86 s 5 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) The abandonment of
any vehicle creates a prima facie presumption that the last registered owner of
record is responsible for the abandonment and is liable for costs incurred in removing,
storing, and disposing of the abandoned vehicle, less amounts realized at
auction.

(2) If an unauthorized
vehicle is found abandoned under subsection (1) of this section and removed at
the direction of law enforcement, the last registered owner of record is guilty
of ((a)) the traffic infraction of "littering‑-abandoned
vehicle," unless the vehicle is redeemed as provided in RCW
46.55.120. In addition to any other monetary penalty payable under chapter
46.63 RCW, the court shall not consider all monetary penalties as having been
paid until the court is satisfied that the person found to have committed the
infraction has made restitution in the amount of the deficiency remaining after
disposal of the vehicle under RCW 46.55.140.

(3) A vehicle theft
report filed with a law enforcement agency relieves the last registered owner
of liability under subsection (2) of this section for failure to redeem the
vehicle. However, the last registered owner remains liable for the costs
incurred in removing, storing, and disposing of the abandoned vehicle under
subsection (1) of this section. Nothing in this section limits in any way the
registered owner's rights in a civil action or as restitution in a criminal
action against a person responsible for the theft of the vehicle.

(4) Properly filing a
report of sale or transfer regarding the vehicle involved in accordance with
RCW 46.12.101(1) relieves the last registered owner of liability under
subsections (1) and (2) of this section. If the date of sale as indicated on
the report of sale is on or before the date of impoundment, the buyer
identified on the latest properly filed report of sale with the department is
assumed liable for the costs incurred in removing, storing, and disposing of
the abandoned vehicle, less amounts realized at auction. If the date of sale
is after the date of impoundment, the previous registered owner is assumed to
be liable for such costs. A licensed vehicle dealer is not liable under
subsections (1) and (2) of this section if the dealer, as transferee or
assignee of the last registered owner of the vehicle involved, has complied
with the requirements of RCW 46.70.122 upon selling or otherwise disposing of
the vehicle, or if the dealer has timely filed a transitional ownership record or
report of sale under RCW 46.12.103. In that case the person to whom the
licensed vehicle dealer has sold or transferred the vehicle is assumed liable
for the costs incurred in removing, storing, and disposing of the abandoned
vehicle, less amounts realized at auction.

(5) For the purposes of
reporting notices of traffic infraction to the department under RCW 46.20.270
and 46.52.101, and for purposes of reporting notices of failure to appear,
respond, or comply regarding a notice of traffic infraction to the department
under RCW 46.63.070(((5))) (6), a traffic infraction under
subsection (2) of this section is not considered to be a standing, stopping, or
parking violation.

(6) A notice of
infraction for a violation of this section may be filed with a court of limited
jurisdiction organized under Title 3, 35, or 35A RCW, or with a violations
bureau subject to the court's jurisdiction.

Sec. 7. RCW 46.55.110 and 1999 c
398 s 6 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) When an unauthorized
vehicle is impounded, the impounding towing operator shall notify the legal and
registered owners of the impoundment of the unauthorized vehicle and the owners
of any other items of personal property registered or titled with the
department. The notification shall be sent by first-class mail within
twenty-four hours after the impoundment to the last known registered and legal
owners of the vehicle, and the owners of any other items of personal property
registered or titled with the department, as provided by the law enforcement
agency, and shall inform the owners of the identity of the person or agency
authorizing the impound. The notification shall include the name of the
impounding tow firm, its address, and telephone number. The notice shall also
include the location, time of the impound, and by whose authority the vehicle
was impounded. The notice shall also include the written notice of the right
of redemption and opportunity for a hearing to contest the validity of the
impoundment pursuant to RCW 46.55.120.

(2) In addition, if a
suspended license impound has been ordered, the notice must state the length of
the impound, the requirement of the posting of a security deposit to ensure
payment of the costs of removal, towing, and storage, notification that if the
security deposit is not posted the vehicle will immediately be processed and
sold at auction as an abandoned vehicle, and the requirements set out in RCW
46.55.120(1)(b) regarding the payment of the costs of removal, towing, and storage
as well as providing proof of satisfaction of any penalties, fines, or
forfeitures before redemption. The notice must also state that the registered
owner is ineligible to purchase the vehicle at the abandoned vehicle auction,
if held.

(3) In the case of an
abandoned vehicle, or other item of personal property registered or titled with
the department, within twenty-four hours after receiving information on the
owners from the department through the abandoned vehicle report, the tow truck
operator shall send by certified mail, with return receipt requested, a notice
of custody and sale to the legal and registered owners and of the penalties
for the traffic infraction littering‑-abandoned vehicle.

(4) If the date on
which a notice required by subsection (3) of this section is to be mailed falls
upon a Saturday, Sunday, or a postal holiday, the notice may be mailed on the
next day that is neither a Saturday, Sunday, nor a postal holiday.

(5) No
notices need be sent to the legal or registered owners of an impounded vehicle
or other item of personal property registered or titled with the department, if
the vehicle or personal property has been redeemed.

Sec. 8. RCW 46.63.030 and 1995 c
219 s 5 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) A law enforcement
officer has the authority to issue a notice of traffic infraction:

(a) When the infraction
is committed in the officer's presence;

(b) When the officer is
acting upon the request of a law enforcement officer in whose presence the
traffic infraction was committed; or

(c) If an officer
investigating at the scene of a motor vehicle accident has reasonable cause to
believe that the driver of a motor vehicle involved in the accident has
committed a traffic infraction.

(2) A court may issue a
notice of traffic infraction upon receipt of a written statement of the officer
that there is reasonable cause to believe that an infraction was committed.

(3) If any motor
vehicle without a driver is found parked, standing, or stopped in violation of
this title or an equivalent administrative regulation or local law, ordinance,
regulation, or resolution, the officer finding the vehicle shall take its
registration number and may take any other information displayed on the vehicle
which may identify its user, and shall conspicuously affix to the vehicle a
notice of traffic infraction. In the case of an abandoned vehicle, the
notice must be entitled "Littering‑-Abandoned Vehicle," and
give notice of the monetary penalty.

(4) In the case of
failure to redeem an abandoned vehicle under RCW 46.55.120, upon receiving a
complaint by a registered tow truck operator that has incurred costs in
removing, storing, and disposing of an abandoned vehicle, an officer of the law
enforcement agency responsible for directing the removal of the vehicle shall
send a notice of infraction by certified mail to the last known address of the
registered owner of the vehicle. The officer shall append to the notice of
infraction, on a form prescribed by the department of licensing, a notice
indicating the amount of costs incurred as a result of removing, storing, and
disposing of the abandoned vehicle, less any amount realized at auction, and a
statement that monetary penalties for the infraction will not be considered as
having been paid until the monetary penalty payable under this chapter has been
paid and the court is satisfied that the person has made restitution in the
amount of the deficiency remaining after disposal of the vehicle.

Sec. 9. RCW 46.63.110 and 1997 c
331 s 3 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) A person found to
have committed a traffic infraction shall be assessed a monetary penalty. No
penalty may exceed two hundred and fifty dollars for each offense unless
authorized by this chapter or title. For the commission of littering‑-abandoned
vehicle under RCW 46.55.105(2), the department shall suspend the driver's
license of the person until all penalties are paid.

(2) The supreme court
shall prescribe by rule a schedule of monetary penalties for designated traffic
infractions. This rule shall also specify the conditions under which local
courts may exercise discretion in assessing fines and penalties for traffic
infractions. The legislature respectfully requests the supreme court to adjust
this schedule every two years for inflation.

(3) There shall be a
penalty of twenty-five dollars for failure to respond to a notice of traffic
infraction except where the infraction relates to parking as defined by local
law, ordinance, regulation, or resolution or failure to pay a monetary penalty
imposed pursuant to this chapter. A local legislative body may set a monetary
penalty not to exceed twenty-five dollars for failure to respond to a notice of
traffic infraction relating to parking as defined by local law, ordinance,
regulation, or resolution. The local court, whether a municipal, police, or
district court, shall impose the monetary penalty set by the local legislative
body.

(4) Monetary penalties
provided for in chapter 46.70 RCW which are civil in nature and penalties which
may be assessed for violations of chapter 46.44 RCW relating to size, weight,
and load of motor vehicles are not subject to the limitation on the amount of
monetary penalties which may be imposed pursuant to this chapter.

(5) Whenever a monetary
penalty is imposed by a court under this chapter it is immediately payable. If
the person is unable to pay at that time the court may, in its discretion,
grant an extension of the period in which the penalty may be paid. If the
penalty is not paid on or before the time established for payment the court
shall notify the department of the failure to pay the penalty, and the
department shall suspend the person's driver's license or driving privilege
until the penalty has been paid and the penalty provided in subsection (3) of
this section has been paid.

(6) In addition to any
other penalties imposed under this section and not subject to the limitation of
subsection (1) of this section, a person found to have committed a traffic
infraction shall be assessed a fee of five dollars per infraction. Under no
circumstances shall this fee be reduced or waived. Revenue from this fee shall
be forwarded to the state treasurer for deposit in the emergency medical
services and trauma care system trust account under RCW 70.168.040.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 10. The legislature
respectfully requests the Washington state supreme court to set the fine for
littering--abandoned vehicle at two hundred fifty dollars.

---
END ---