BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF
WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec.
1. A new section is added
to chapter 84.36 RCW to read as follows:

(1) When property that
is used for the purpose of generating or transmitting electricity and that
belongs to the United States or any of its agencies or instrumentalities is
transferred to private ownership or otherwise loses its exempt status, the
county treasurer shall collect all taxes which would have been paid had the
property not been exempt during the twenty years preceding, or the life of the
exemption, if that be less, together with the interest at the same rate and
computed in the same way as that upon delinquent property taxes.

(2) Subsection (1) of
this section applies only when ownership of the property is transferred or when
fifty-one percent or more of the area of the property loses its exempt status.
The additional tax under subsection (1) of this section shall not be imposed
if:

(a) The property is
transferred to a nonprofit organization, association, or corporation for a use
which also qualifies and is granted exemption under this chapter; or

(b) The property
qualifies for forest land valuation under chapter 84.33 RCW.

(3) The
additional tax under subsection (1) of this section is the obligation of the
buyer or other owner subsequent to the United States, and is a lien against the
property in the same manner as other taxes under this title.

--- END ---