BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF
WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1. RCW 28B.15.045 and 1994
c 41 s 1 are each amended to read as follows:

The legislature
recognizes that institutional governing boards have a responsibility to manage
and protect institutions of higher education. This responsibility includes
ensuring certain lawful agreements for which revenues from services and
activities fees have been pledged. Such lawful agreements include, but are not
limited to, bond covenant agreements and other contractual obligations.
Institutional governing boards are also expected to protect the stability of
programs that benefit students.

The legislature also
recognizes that services and activities fees are paid by students for the
express purpose of funding student services and programs. It is the intent of
the legislature that governing boards ensure that students have a strong voice
in recommending budgets for services and activities fees. The boards of
trustees and the boards of regents of the respective institutions of higher
education shall adopt guidelines governing the establishment and funding of
programs supported by services and activities fees. Such guidelines shall
stipulate procedures for budgeting and expending services and activities fee
revenue. Any such guidelines shall be consistent with the following
provisions:

(1) Student
representatives from the services and activities fee committee and
representatives of the college or university administration shall have an
opportunity to address the board before board decisions on services and
activities fee budgets and dispute resolution actions are made;

(2) Members of the
governing boards shall adhere to the principle that services and activities fee
committee desires be given priority consideration on funding items that do not
fall into the categories of preexisting contractual obligations, bond covenant
agreements, or stability for programs affecting students;

(3) Responsibility for
proposing to the administration and the governing board program priorities and
budget levels for that portion of program budgets that derive from services and
activities fees shall reside with a services and activities fee committee, on
which students shall hold at least a majority of the voting memberships, such
student members shall represent diverse student interests, and shall be
recommended by the student government association or its equivalent. The
chairperson of the services and activities fee committee shall be selected by
the members of that committee. The governing board shall insure that the
services and activities fee committee provides an opportunity for all
viewpoints to be heard at a public meeting during its consideration of the
funding of student programs and activities((.));

(4) The services and
activities fee committee shall evaluate existing and proposed programs and
submit budget recommendations for the expenditure of those services and
activities fees with supporting documents simultaneously to the college or
university governing board and administration((.));

(5) The college or university
administration shall review the services and activities fee committee budget
recommendations and publish a written response to the services and activities
fee committee. This response shall outline potential areas of difference
between the committee recommendations and the administration's proposed budget
recommendations. This response, with supporting documentation, shall be
submitted to the services and activities fee committee in a timely manner to
allow adequate consideration((.));

(6)(a) In the event of
a dispute or disputes involving the services and activities fee committee
recommendations, the college or university administration shall meet with the
services and activities fee committee in a good faith effort to resolve such
dispute or disputes prior to submittal of final recommendations or decisions
to the governing board((.));

(b) Except under (c)
of this subsection, if ((said)) the dispute is not resolved
within fourteen days, a dispute resolution committee shall be convened by the chair
of the services and activities fee committee within fourteen days((.));
and

(c) If the dispute
is before the committee because of an action under subsection (14) of this
section, the decision of the committee is final. The fourteen-day requirement
under (b) of this subsection is stayed by any intervening summer session and
commences on the first day of the fall session;

(7) The dispute
resolution committee shall be selected as follows: The college or university
administration shall appoint two nonvoting advisory members; the governing
board shall appoint three voting members; and the services and activities fee
committee chair shall appoint three student members of the services and
activities fee committee who will have a vote, and one student representing the
services and activities fee committee who will chair the dispute resolution
committee and be nonvoting. The committee shall meet in good faith, and settle
by vote any and all disputes. In the event of a tie vote, the chair of the
dispute resolution committee shall vote to settle the dispute((.));

(8) The governing board
may take action on those portions of the services and activities fee budget not
in dispute in accordance with the customary budget approval timeline
established by the board. The governing board shall consider the results, if
any, of the dispute resolution committee and shall take action((.));

(9) Services and
activities fees and revenues generated by programs and activities funded by
such fees shall be deposited and expended through the office of the chief
fiscal officer of the institution((.));

(10) Services and
activities fees and revenues generated by programs and activities funded by
such fees shall be subject to the applicable policies, regulations, and
procedures of the institution and the budget and accounting act, chapter 43.88
RCW((.));

(11) All information
pertaining to services and activities fees budgets shall be made available to
interested parties((.));

(12) With the exception
of any funds needed for bond covenant obligations, once the budget for
expending service and activities fees is approved by the governing board, funds
shall not be shifted from funds budgeted for associated students or
departmentally related categories or the reserve fund until the administration
provides written justification to the services and activities fee committee and
the governing board, and the governing board and the services and activities
fee committee give their express approval. In the event of a fund transfer
dispute among the services and activities fee committee, the administration, or
the governing board, ((said)) the dispute shall be resolved
pursuant to subsections (6)(b), (7), and (8) of this section((.));

(13) Any service and
activities fees collected which exceed initially budgeted amounts are subject
to subsections (1) through (10) and (12) of this section; and

(14)
Any action that imposes mandatory, but refundable fees, or authorizes
expenditures of services and activities fees must be reviewed by the board of
regents or trustees within ninety days, if the action is approved by a vote of
two-thirds of the students voting and notice of the vote on the action is made
at least ninety days prior to the vote. If the board of regents or trustees
does not approve the action or fails to complete a review within ninety days,
the action is in dispute and subject to resolution by the dispute resolution
committee under subsection (6)(c) of this section.

--- END ---