BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF
WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1. RCW 46.44.090 and 1977
ex.s. c 151 s 30 are each amended to read as follows:

The
department of transportation, pursuant to rules adopted by the transportation
commission with respect to state highways and local authorities with respect to
public highways under their jurisdiction may, upon application in writing and
good cause being shown therefor, issue a special permit in writing authorizing
the applicant to operate or move a vehicle or combination of vehicles of a
size, weight of vehicle, or load exceeding the maximum specified in this
chapter or otherwise not in conformity with the provisions of this chapter upon
any public highway under the jurisdiction of the authority granting such permit
and for the maintenance of which such authority is responsible. However, a
vehicle with an oversize or overwidth load permit may carry a smaller load
while going to or coming from carrying an oversize load.

--- END ---