BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF
WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1. RCW 36.32.050 and 1963 c
4 s 36.32.050 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) Except as
provided under subsection (2) of this section, county commissioners shall
be elected by the ((qualified)) registered voters of the entire
county and the person receiving the highest number of votes for the office of
commissioner for the district in which he or she resides shall be
declared duly elected from that district.

(2) In
a noncharter county with a population greater than three hundred thousand, the
commissioners shall be elected by commissioner district.

--- END ---