BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF
WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec.
1. A new section is added
to chapter 43.43 RCW to read as follows:

The identity theft
bureau is created in the Washington state patrol, to consist of law
enforcement officers, assistant attorneys general, and representatives of
county prosecuting attorneys experienced in the investigation, apprehension,
and prosecution of identity theft offenders under chapter 9.35 RCW. The bureau
shall coordinate and assist efforts of law enforcement agencies, prosecuting
attorneys, and the attorney general in investigating, apprehending, and
prosecuting offenders under chapter 9.35 RCW.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
2. A new section is added to
chapter 43.10 RCW to read as follows:

An identity theft
division is created in the office of the attorney general to assist citizens in
the prevention, education, and prosecution of identity theft. The identity
theft division shall:

(1) Provide a central
point of consumer information and education on issues related to identity
theft;

(2) Provide technical
assistance to businesses developing policies regarding the use of nonpublic
personal information, including developing model information privacy policies;
and

(3) Assist and
coordinate with the identity theft bureau of the Washington state patrol in the
prosecution of crimes related to identity theft.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
3. A new section is added
to chapter 9.35 RCW to read as follows:

(1) The following are
subject to seizure and forfeiture and no property right exists in them:

(a) All tangible or
intangible property, including any right or interest in such property, acquired
by a person convicted of an offense under this chapter to the extent the
acquisition is the direct or indirect result of the convicted person having
committed the offense; and

(b) Any property
acquired through the traceable proceeds of property described in (a) of this
subsection.

(2) A seizure and
forfeiture of property authorized under this section shall be conducted in
accordance with the provisions of RCW 7.68.320.

(3) The proceeds of any
forfeiture action brought under this section shall be distributed as follows:

(a) First, to the
victims to satisfy any restitution ordered as part of the convicted person's
sentence; and

(b)
Second, to the Washington state patrol for the operation of the identity theft
bureau.

---
END ---