BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF
WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec.
1. The legislature finds
that the deduction under the business and occupation tax statutes for
compensation from public entities for health or social welfare services was
intended to provide government with greater purchasing power when government
provides financial support for the provision of health or social welfare
services to benefited classes of persons, except when this financial support is
extended pursuant to employee benefit plans. The legislature also finds that
the failure to define "employee benefits plan" has raised the
question whether statutory benefits provided for the uniformed services of the
United States are within the scope of amounts paid under employee benefit
plans. The legislature also finds that members of the uniformed services are
not generally considered to be employees, and that the deduction's limitation
with respect to employee benefit plans should be clarified to this effect.

Sec. 2. RCW 82.04.4297 and 1988
c 67 s 1 are each amended to read as follows:

In computing tax there
may be deducted from the measure of tax amounts received from the United States
or any instrumentality thereof or from the state of Washington or any municipal
corporation or political subdivision thereof as compensation for, or to
support, health or social welfare services rendered by a health or social
welfare organization or by a municipal corporation or political subdivision,
except deductions are not allowed under this section for amounts that are
received under an employee benefit plan. For the purposes of this section,
"employee benefit plan" does not include the military benefits
program authorized in 10 U.S.C. Sec. 1071 et seq., as amended, or amounts
payable pursuant thereto.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
3. This act applies to all
taxes collected after the effective date of this act, including taxes collected
on reporting periods prior to the effective date of this act.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 4. This act is necessary for
the immediate preservation of the public peace, health, or safety, or support
of the state government and its existing public institutions, and takes effect
immediately.

---
END ---