BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF
WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1. RCW 71.12.455 and 2000 c
93 s 21 are each amended to read as follows:

As used in this
chapter, "establishment" and "institution" mean and include
every private hospital, sanitarium, home, or other place receiving or caring
for any mentally ill, mentally incompetent person, or chemically dependent
person or any like facility not otherwise established by statute and
operated by a public entity.

Sec. 2. RCW 71.12.460 and 2000 c
93 s 22 are each amended to read as follows:

No person,
association, public entity, or corporation, shall establish or keep, for
compensation or hire, an establishment as defined in this chapter without first
having obtained a license therefor from the department of health, complied with
rules adopted under this chapter, and paid the license fee provided in this
chapter. Any person who carries on, conducts, or attempts to carry on or
conduct an establishment as defined in this chapter without first having
obtained a license from the department of health, as in this chapter provided,
is guilty of a misdemeanor and on conviction thereof shall be punished by
imprisonment in a county jail not exceeding six months, or by a fine not
exceeding one thousand dollars, or by both such fine and imprisonment. The managing
and executive officers of any corporation violating the provisions of this
chapter shall be liable under the provisions of this chapter in the same manner
and to the same effect as a private individual violating the same.

---
END ---