BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF
WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec.
1. A new section is added
to chapter 82.04 RCW to read as follows:

(1) In computing tax there
may be deducted from the measure of tax amounts derived by a person as
compensation from the sale of grass or straw-based construction materials.

(2) As used in this
section, "grass or straw-based construction materials" means finished
materials that are certified by an accredited testing laboratory for use in the
construction, repair, or rehabilitation of residential structures and that are
composed of grass or straw materials.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
2. A new section is added
to chapter 82.08 RCW to read as follows:

The tax levied by RCW
82.08.020 does not apply to sales of grass or straw-based construction
materials. As used in this section, "grass or straw-based construction
materials" has the same meaning as in section 1 of this act.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
3. A new section is added
to chapter 82.12 RCW to read as follows:

The
provisions of this chapter do not apply in respect to the use of grass or
straw-based construction materials in the construction, repair, or
rehabilitation of residential structures. As used in this section, "grass
or straw-based construction materials" has the same meaning as in section
1 of this act.

---
END ---