BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF
WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec.
1. A new section is added
to chapter 26.44 RCW to read as follows:

In cases
involving a child abuse, neglect, or fatality review team of volunteers, a team
member acting in good faith and without gross negligence in the performance of
his or her duties shall be indemnified by the state from claims arising out of
the team's investigation. If a claim is made against a team member, the
plaintiff has the burden of proving the member acted in bad faith.

--- END ---