BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF
WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec.
1. A new section is added
to chapter 43.10 RCW to read as follows:

The office of identity
theft prevention and protection is created within the office of the attorney
general for the purpose of assisting individuals and businesses to prevent and
protect against identity theft.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
2. A new section is added
to chapter 43.10 RCW to read as follows:

The office of identity
theft prevention and protection has the following duties:

(1) Provide technical
assistance to businesses developing policies regarding the use of personal
information, including developing model information privacy policies;

(2) Provide consumer
education and be a central contact point for consumer information on identity
theft issues; and

(3) Assist
local prosecutors to coordinate prosecution of crimes related to identity
theft.

---
END ---