BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF
WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec.
1. The legislature finds
that the careless disposal of personal information by commercial, governmental,
or other entities poses a significant threat of identity theft, thus risking a
person's privacy, financial security, and other interests. The alarming
increase in identity theft crimes and other problems associated with the
improper disposal of personal information can be traced, in part, to disposal
policies and methods that make it easy for unscrupulous persons to obtain and
use that information to the detriment of the public. Accordingly, the
legislature declares that all organizations and individuals have a continuing
obligation to ensure the security and confidentiality of personal information
during the process of disposing of that information.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
2. The definitions in this
section apply throughout this chapter unless the context clearly requires
otherwise.

(1) "Entity"
includes a sole proprietor, partnership, corporation, limited liability
company, trust, association, financial institution, governmental entity, other
than the federal government, and any other individual or group, engaged in a trade,
occupation, enterprise, governmental function, or similar activity in this
state, however organized and whether organized to operate at a profit.

(2) "Destroy
personal information" means shredding, erasing, or otherwise modifying
personal information in records to make the personal information unreadable or
undecipherable through any reasonable means.

(3)
"Individual" means a natural person, except that if the individual is
under a legal disability, "individual" includes a parent or duly
appointed legal representative.

(4) "Personal
financial" and "health information" mean information that is
identifiable to an individual and that is commonly used for financial or health
care purposes, including account numbers, access codes or passwords, information
gathered for account security purposes, credit card numbers, information held
for the purpose of account access or transaction initiation, or information
that relates to medical history or status.

(5) "Personal
identification number issued by a government entity" means a tax
identification number, social security number, driver's license or permit
number, state identification card number issued by the department of licensing,
or any other number or code issued by a government entity for the purpose of personal
identification that is protected and is not available to the public under any
circumstances.

(6) "Record"
includes any material, regardless of the physical form, on which information is
recorded or preserved by any means, including in written or spoken words,
graphically depicted, printed, or electromagnetically transmitted.
"Record" does not include publicly available directories containing
information an individual has voluntarily consented to have publicly
disseminated or listed, such as name, address, or telephone number.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
3. (1) An entity must take
all reasonable steps to destroy, or arrange for the destruction of, personal
financial and health information and personal identification numbers issued by
government entities in an individual's records within its custody or control
when the entity is disposing of records that it will no longer retain.

(2) An entity is not
liable under this section for records it has relinquished to the custody and
control of the individual to whom the records pertain.

(3) This subsection
does not apply to the disposal of records by a transfer of the records, not
otherwise prohibited by law, to another entity, including a transfer to archive
or otherwise preserve public records as required by law.

(4) An individual
injured by the failure of an entity to comply with subsection (1) of this
section may bring a civil action in a court of competent jurisdiction. The
court may:

(a) If the failure to
comply is due to negligence, award a penalty of two hundred dollars or actual
damages, whichever is greater, and costs and reasonable attorneys' fees; and

(b) If the failure to
comply is willful, award a penalty of six hundred dollars or damages equal to
three times actual damages, whichever is greater, and costs and reasonable
attorneys' fees. However, treble damages may not exceed ten thousand dollars.

(5) An individual
having reason to believe that he or she may be injured by an act or failure to
act that does not comply with subsection (1) of this section may apply to a
court of competent jurisdiction to enjoin the act or failure to act. The court
may grant an injunction with terms and conditions as the court may deem
equitable.

(6) The attorney
general may bring a civil action in the name of the state for damages,
injunctive relief, or both, against an entity that fails to comply with
subsection (1) of this section. The court may award damages that are the same
as those awarded to individual plaintiffs under subsection (4) of this section.

(7) The rights and
remedies provided under this section are in addition to any other rights or
remedies provided by law.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
4. Any bank, financial
institution, health care organization, or other entity that is subject to the
federal regulations under the interagency guidelines establishing standards for
safeguarding customer information (12 C.F.R. 208 Appendix D-2, 12 C.F.R. 364
Appendix B, 12 C.F.R. 30 Appendix B, 12 C.F.R. 570 Appendix B); the guidelines
for safeguarding member information (12 C.F.R. 748 Appendix A); and the
standards for privacy of individually identifiable health information (45
C.F.R. 160 and 164), and which is in compliance with these federal guidelines,
is in compliance with the requirements of this chapter.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 5. Sections 1 through 4 of
this act constitute a new chapter in Title 19 RCW.

---
END ---