BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF
WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec.
1. INTENT. The legislature finds
that every information custodian has an affirmative and continuing obligation
to adopt and disclose information privacy policies with respect to the
collection and use of its customers' nonpublic personal information, and to
protect the security and confidentiality of those customers' nonpublic personal
information. The legislature also finds that an information custodian has a
further obligation to enable their customers to prevent the sharing of certain
nonpublic personal information with anyone, including affiliates. The
legislature intends: (1) To expand on federal protections relating to the
collection and use of customers' personal and/or sensitive information; (2) to
ensure the citizens of Washington have access to an information custodian
privacy policy; and (3) to provide remedies for noncompliance.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
2. DEFINITIONS. Unless the
context clearly requires otherwise, the definitions in this section apply
throughout this chapter.

(1)
"Affiliate" includes any company or organization that controls, is
controlled by, or is under common control with another company or organization.

(2) "Information
custodian" includes any person or governmental entity, not including the
federal government, that collects, stores, or maintains data containing
nonpublic personal information regarding a consumer and that sells, shares, or
otherwise transfers such information to others, including affiliates, for
purposes other than those specifically requested by the consumer.

(3) "Nonpublic
personal information" means personally identifiable information provided
by a consumer to an information custodian resulting from any transaction with
the consumer or any service performed for the consumer, or otherwise obtained
by an information custodian; but does not include publicly available
information as that term is defined by federal regulations under P.L. 106-102
(Gramm-Leach-Bliley Act of 1999).

(4) "Person"
means natural persons, corporations, trusts, unincorporated associations, and
partnerships, whether for profit or nonprofit.

(5)
"Consumer" means an individual that obtains, from an information
custodian, products or services that are to be used primarily for personal,
family, or household purposes, and also means the legal representative of such
individual.

(6)
"Customer" means a consumer who establishes an ongoing relationship
with an information custodian through the completion of one or more
transactions.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
3. DISCLOSURE OF INFORMATION
PRIVACY POLICY. An information custodian shall have an information privacy
policy explicitly stating the policies and practices of the information
custodian regarding the use of nonpublic personal information acquired from any
consumer. The policy shall, at minimum, state the following:

(1) The categories of
information that may be collected regarding the consumer, including examples;

(2) How the categories
of information may be used by the information custodian and any other person
with whom the information may be shared;

(3) Whether or not the
information may be shared with, or transferred to, other persons, including
affiliates;

(4) With what other
persons the information may be shared, including affiliates;

(5) The categories of
information that may be shared with, or transferred to, other persons,
including affiliates;

(6) Whether or not the
customer may elect that information not be shared with any other person,
including affiliates, and a clear description of the procedure for exercising
such an option;

(7) The procedure by
which a customer may notify an information custodian of any errors in the
information collected regarding the customer; and

(8) A general
description of how the information custodian protects the security of the
nonpublic personal information collected about the customer.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
4. NOTIFICATION OF POLICY
CHANGES. An information custodian shall notify a customer of any proposed
changes in the information privacy policy required under this chapter. This
notice shall clearly describe the nature of the change and how the changed
policy differs from the policy originally disclosed and shall be provided to
the customer not less than sixty days before the proposed change is to take
effect.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
5. METHOD OF POLICY
DISCLOSURE. (1) The disclosure of the information privacy policy required by
this chapter shall be by clear and conspicuous notice, stated in plain and unambiguous
language, and shall be published in writing, or electronic form, or such other
form consistent with this chapter. The method of the disclosure must be
reasonably calculated to provide actual and meaningful notice to a consumer
covered under this chapter.

(2) An information
custodian's compliance with the requirements of P.L. 106-102
(Gramm-Leach-Bliley Act of 1999) and its implementing regulations constitutes
compliance with the requirements of this section.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
6. TIMING OF POLICY
DISCLOSURE. (1) An information custodian shall make the required policy
disclosures to a consumer at the time of the initial transaction with the
consumer, or at the time of the establishment of the relationship with the consumer,
and not less than annually thereafter.

(2) If the information
privacy policy is amended, the information custodian shall notify a customer of
such amendment not later than thirty days after the adoption of the amendment.

(3) For persons with an
existing relationship with an information custodian on the effective date of
this section, the information custodian shall make the required disclosures
within sixty days after the effective date of this section.

(4) An information
custodian's compliance with the requirements under section 503 of P.L. 106-102
(Gramm-Leach-Bliley Act of 1999) and its implementing regulations constitutes
compliance with the requirements of this section.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
7. POLICY REGISTRATION
REQUIREMENT. (1) An information custodian shall file with the attorney general
a copy of the information privacy policy required under this chapter. The
policy shall be filed with the attorney general not later than sixty days after
the adoption of the policy.

(2) If an existing
policy is subject to amendment, the amended policy must be filed with the
attorney general by the information custodian not later than sixty days after
the adoption of the amendment.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
8. REMEDIES FOR
NONCOMPLIANCE. (1) A consumer may bring a civil action for damages, injunctive
relief, or both against an information custodian that has failed to comply with
this chapter. If the violation is inadvertent, the consumer may recover his or
her actual damages. If the violation is due to negligence, damages are to be
in the amount of five hundred dollars, or actual damages, whichever is greater,
as well as the costs of the suit, including attorneys' fees. Upon a showing
that the violation of this chapter was willful, a court may increase the award
of damages in an amount not more than three times the actual damages sustained,
or one thousand five hundred dollars, whichever is greater, as well as the
costs of the suit, including attorneys' fees.

(2) The attorney
general may bring a civil action for damages, injunctive relief, or both
against an information custodian who has failed to comply with this chapter.
Damages are the same as those for individual plaintiffs, under subsection (1)
of this section.

(3) The legislature
finds that the practices covered by this chapter are matters vitally affecting
the public interest for the purpose of applying the consumer protection act,
chapter 19.86 RCW. A violation of this chapter is not reasonable in relation
to the development and preservation of business and is an unfair or deceptive
act in trade or commerce and an unfair method of competition for the purpose of
applying the consumer protection act, chapter 19.86 RCW. Remedies under
chapter 19.86 RCW are available in addition to the remedies under this chapter.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
9. EFFECT OF PUBLIC
DISCLOSURE ACT. This chapter does not apply to any information that is subject
to disclosure by a public agency under the public disclosure act, chapter 42.17
RCW, or where disclosure by a public agency is required by another statute.
For purposes of this section, "public agency" means the same as
"agency" in RCW 42.17.020.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
10. RULE-MAKING AUTHORITY.
The attorney general may adopt and enforce rules as necessary under this
chapter.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
11. Captions used in this
chapter are not any part of the law.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 12. Sections 1 through 11 of
this act constitute a new chapter in Title 19 RCW.

---
END ---