BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF
WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec.
1. (1) The legislature
recognizes that according to a 1999 Gallup Poll, a majority of Americans, black
and white, believed that police actively engage in the practice of racial
profiling. Eighty-one percent of those questioned said they disapprove of the
practice.

(2) In A Resource
Guide on Racial Profiling Data Collection Systems published by the United
States department of justice in November 2000, "racial profiling"
means any police-initiated action that relies on the race, ethnicity, or
national origin rather than the behavior of an individual or information that
leads the police to a particular individual who has been identified as being,
or having been, engaged in criminal activity. It is the intent of the
legislature to make information on this practice available, in a usable format,
to policymakers and law enforcement agencies.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
2. A new section is added
to chapter 43.101 RCW to read as follows:

(1) Beginning July 1,
2002, except for traffic enforcement agencies already compiling the information
required by this section, every traffic enforcement agency in this state shall
provide an annual report to the criminal justice training commission, on forms
provided by the commission, including the following information:

(a) The number of
individuals stopped for routine traffic enforcement, whether or not a citation
or warning was issued;

(b) Identifying
characteristics of the individual stopped, including the race or ethnicity,
approximate age, and gender;

(c) The nature of the
alleged traffic infraction or violation that led to the stop;

(d) Whether a search
was instituted as a result of the stop;

(e) The legal basis for
the search, including whether consent was obtained, whether a canine unit was
alerted, and whether there was probable cause or reasonable suspicion to
suspect a crime; and

(f) Whether an arrest
was made, or a written citation issued, as a result of either the stop or the
search.

(2) The criminal
justice training commission, in cooperation with affected law enforcement
agencies, shall compile the information required under subsection (1) of this
section in a manner that is of value in guiding legislative policies, assisting
the persons in charge of the apprehension, prosecution, and treatment of
persons who are suspected of breaching the law, as well as benefiting crime and
delinquency prevention efforts. The report shall include statistics which are
comparable with national uniform criminal statistics published by federal
bureaus or departments.

(3) Data
acquired under this section shall not contain any information that may reveal
the identity of any individual who is stopped.

(4) The
information required under subsection (1) of this section shall be reported to
the commission with codes used to identify areas of patrol within the
jurisdiction of the traffic enforcement agency. The coding system shall be
known only by the reporting traffic enforcement agency.

---
END ---