BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF
WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec.
1. (1) The legislature
recognizes that according to a 1999 Gallup Poll, a majority of Americans, black
and white, believed that police actively engage in the practice of racial
profiling. Eighty-one percent of those questioned said they disapprove of the
practice.

(2) In A Resource
Guide on Racial Profiling Data Collection Systems published by the United
States department of justice in November 2000, "racial profiling"
means any police-initiated action that relies on the race, ethnicity, or
national origin rather than the behavior of an individual or information that
leads the police to a particular individual who has been identified as being,
or having been, engaged in criminal activity. It is the intent of the
legislature to make information on this practice available, in a usable format,
to policymakers and law enforcement agencies.

(3) The legislature
declares that racial profiling is the illegal use of race or ethnicity as a
factor in deciding to stop and question, take enforcement action, arrest, or
search a person or vehicle with or without a legal basis under the United
States Constitution or Washington state Constitution.

(4) The legislature
recognizes that the president of the United States has issued an executive
order stating that stopping or searching individuals on the basis of race is
not an effective law enforcement policy, that it is inconsistent with
democratic ideals, especially the commitment to equal protection under the law
for all persons, and that it is neither legitimate nor defensible as a strategy
for public protection. The order also instructs the law enforcement agencies within
the departments of justice, treasury, and interior to collect race, ethnicity,
and gender data on the people they stop or arrest.

(5) The legislature
finds that the Washington state patrol has been in the process of collecting
data on traffic stops and analyzing the data to determine if the patrol has any
areas in its enforcement of traffic laws where minorities are being treated in
a discriminatory manner. The legislature further finds that the Washington
association of sheriffs and police chiefs has recently passed a resolution
condemning racial profiling and has reaffirmed local law enforcement agencies'
commitment to ensuring the public safety and the protection of civil liberties
for all persons. The association also restated its goal of implementing
policing procedures that are fair, equitable, and constitutional.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
2. A new section is added
to chapter 43.101 RCW to read as follows:

(1) Beginning July 1,
2002, all local law enforcement agencies in this state shall provide an annual
report to the Washington association of sheriffs and police chiefs and the
criminal justice training commission, on forms provided by the commission,
including the following information:

(a) The number of
individuals stopped for routine traffic enforcement, whether or not a citation
or warning was issued;

(b) Identifying
characteristics of the individual stopped, including the race or ethnicity,
approximate age, and gender;

(c) The nature of the
alleged traffic infraction or violation that led to the stop;

(d) Whether a search
was instituted as a result of the stop;

(e) The legal basis for
the search, including whether consent was obtained, whether a canine unit was
alerted, and whether there was probable cause or reasonable suspicion to
suspect a crime; and

(f) Whether an arrest
was made, or a written citation issued, as a result of either the stop or the
search.

(2) The criminal
justice training commission, in cooperation with affected law enforcement
agencies, shall compile the information required under subsection (1) of this
section in a manner that is of value in guiding legislative policies, assisting
the persons in charge of the apprehension, prosecution, and treatment of
persons who are suspected of breaching the law, as well as benefiting crime and
delinquency prevention efforts. The report shall include statistics which are
comparable with national uniform criminal statistics published by federal
bureaus or departments.

(3) Data acquired under
this section shall not contain any information that may reveal the identity of
any individual who is stopped.

(4) The information
required under subsection (1) of this section shall be reported to the
commission with codes used to identify areas of patrol within the jurisdiction
of the local law enforcement agency. The coding system shall be known only by
the reporting local law enforcement agency.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
3. A new section is added
to chapter 43.101 RCW to read as follows:

(1) Local law
enforcement agencies shall comply with the recommendations of the Washington
association of sheriffs and police chiefs regarding racial profiling, as set
forth under (a) through (f) of this subsection. Local law enforcement agencies
shall:

(a) Adopt a written
policy designed to condemn and prevent racial profiling;

(b) Review and audit
their existing procedures, practices, and training to ensure that they do not
enable or foster the practice of racial profiling;

(c) Continue training
to address the issues related to racial profiling. Officers should be trained
in how to better interact with persons they stop so that legitimate police
actions are not misperceived as racial profiling;

(d) Ensure that they
have in place a citizen complaint review process that can adequately address
instances of racial profiling. The process must be accessible to citizens and
must be fair. Officers found to be engaged in racial profiling must be held
accountable through the appropriate disciplinary procedures within each
department;

(e) Work with the
minority groups in their community to appropriately address the issue of racial
profiling; and

(f) Within fiscal
constraints, collect demographic data on traffic stops and analyze that data to
ensure that racial profiling is not occurring.

(2) The Washington
association of sheriffs and police chiefs shall coordinate with the criminal
justice training commission to ensure that issues related to racial profiling
are addressed in basic law enforcement training and offered in regional
training for in-service law enforcement officers at all levels.

(3) Local law
enforcement agencies shall report all information required under this section
to the Washington association of sheriffs and police chiefs.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
4. A new section is added
to chapter 43.101 RCW to read as follows:

The
Washington association of sheriffs and police chiefs, in cooperation with the
criminal justice training commission, shall report to the legislature by
December 31, 2001, and each December 31st thereafter, on the progress and
accomplishments of each local law enforcement agency in the state in meeting
the requirements and goals set forth in section 3 of this act.

---
END ---