BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF
WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec.
1. The legislature intends
to direct funds from burning permits collected by the agricultural burning
practices and research task force to the port of Walla Walla to develop a pilot
manufacturing facility that will use straw waste raw materials in the manufacture
of straw board or other products.

Sec. 2. RCW 70.94.650 and 1998 c
43 s 1 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) Any person who
proposes to set fires in the course of:

(a) Weed abatement;

(b) Instruction in
methods of fire fighting, except training to fight structural fires as provided
in RCW 52.12.150 or training to fight aircraft crash rescue fires as provided
in subsection (5) of this section, and except forest fire training; or

(c) Agricultural
activities,

shall obtain a permit from
an air pollution control authority, the department of ecology, or a local
entity delegated permitting authority under RCW 70.94.654. General permit
criteria of statewide applicability shall be established by the department, by
rule, after consultation with the various air pollution control authorities.
Permits shall be issued under this section based on seasonal operations or by
individual operations, or both. All permits shall be conditioned to insure
that the public interest in air, water, and land pollution and safety to life
and property is fully considered. In addition to any other requirements
established by the department to protect air quality pursuant to other laws,
applicants for permits must show that the setting of fires as requested is the
most reasonable procedure to follow in safeguarding life or property under all
circumstances or is otherwise reasonably necessary to successfully carry out
the enterprise in which the applicant is engaged, or both. All burning permits
will be designed to minimize air pollution insofar as practical. Nothing in
this section shall relieve the applicant from obtaining permits, licenses, or
other approvals required by any other law. An application for a permit to set
fires in the course of agricultural burning for controlling diseases, insects,
weed abatement or development of physiological conditions conducive to
increased crop yield, shall be acted upon within seven days from the date such
application is filed. The department of ecology and local air authorities
shall provide convenient methods for issuance and oversight of agricultural
burning permits. The department and local air authorities shall, through
agreement, work with counties and cities to provide convenient methods for granting
permission for agricultural burning, including telephone, facsimile
transmission, issuance from local city or county offices, or other methods. A
local air authority administering the permit program under this subsection
(1)(c) shall not limit the number of days of allowable agricultural burning,
but may consider the time of year, meteorological conditions, and other
criteria specified in rules adopted by the department to implement this
subsection (1)(c).

(2) Permit fees shall
be assessed for burning under this section and shall be collected by the
department of ecology, the appropriate local air authority, or a local entity
delegated permitting authority pursuant to RCW 70.94.654 at the time the permit
is issued. All fees collected shall be deposited in the air pollution control
account created in RCW 70.94.015, except for that portion of the fee necessary
to cover local costs of administering a permit issued under this section. Fees
shall be set by rule by the permitting agency at the level determined by the
task force created by subsection (4) of this section, but shall not exceed two
dollars and fifty cents per acre to be burned. After fees are established by
rule, any increases in such fees shall be limited to annual inflation
adjustments as determined by the state office of the economic and revenue
forecast council.

(3) Conservation
districts and the Washington State University agricultural extension program in
conjunction with the department shall develop public education material for the
agricultural community identifying the health and environmental effects of
agricultural outdoor burning and providing technical assistance in alternatives
to agricultural outdoor burning.

(4) An agricultural
burning practices and research task force shall be established under the
direction of the department. The task force shall be composed of a
representative from the department who shall serve as chair; one representative
of eastern Washington local air authorities; three representatives of the
agricultural community from different agricultural pursuits; one representative
of the department of agriculture; two representatives from universities or
colleges knowledgeable in agricultural issues; one representative of the public
health or medical community; and one representative of the conservation
districts. The task force shall identify best management practices for
reducing air contaminant emissions from agricultural activities and provide
such information to the department and local air authorities. In addition,
the task force shall work with local governments and port districts to assist
them in developing programs that will use straw waste raw materials in
Washington in the manufacture of straw board or other products. The task
force shall determine the level of fees to be assessed by the permitting agency
pursuant to subsection (2) of this section, based upon the level necessary to
cover the costs of administering and enforcing the permit programs, and
to provide funds ((for research into alternative methods to reduce emissions
from such burning, and to the extent possible be consistent with fees charged
for such burning permits in neighboring states. The fee level shall provide,
to the extent possible, for lesser fees for permittees who use best management
practices to minimize air contaminant emissions)), until July 1, 2006,
to the port of Walla Walla to be used in the development of a pilot
manufacturing facility that will use straw waste raw materials collected in
Washington state in the manufacture of straw board or other products. The
task force shall ((identify research)) monitor the progress of the
development of the pilot manufacturing facility to determine additional
needs related to minimizing emissions from agricultural burning and ((alternatives
to such burning. Further, the task force shall make recommendations to the
department on priorities for spending funds provided through this chapter for
research into alternative methods to reduce emissions from agricultural burning))
make recommendations to the legislature for additional actions that would be
necessary to expand the pilot manufacturing facility program to other areas in
the state.

(5) A permit is not
required under this section, or under RCW 70.94.743 through 70.94.780, from an
air pollution control authority, the department, or any local entity with
delegated permit authority, for aircraft crash rescue fire training activities
meeting the following conditions:

(a) Fire fighters
participating in the training fires must be limited to those who provide fire
fighting support to an airport that is either certified by the federal aviation
administration or operated in support of military or governmental activities;

(b) The fire training
may not be conducted during an air pollution episode or any stage of impaired
air quality declared under RCW 70.94.715 for the area where training is to be
conducted;

(c) The number of
training fires allowed per year without a permit shall be the minimum number
necessary to meet federal aviation administration or other federal safety
requirements;

(d) The facility shall
use current technology and be operated in a manner that will minimize, to the
extent possible, the air contaminants generated during operation; and

(e) Prior to the
commencement of the aircraft fire training, the organization conducting training
shall notify both the: (i) Local fire district or fire department; and (ii)
air pollution control authority, department of ecology, or local entity
delegated permitting authority under RCW 70.94.654, having jurisdiction within
the area where training is to be conducted.

Written approval from
the department or a local air pollution control authority shall be obtained
prior to the initial operation of aircraft crash rescue fire training. Such
approval will be granted to fire training activities meeting the conditions in
this subsection.

(6) Aircraft crash
rescue fire training activities conducted in compliance with subsection (5)
of this ((subsection)) section are not subject to the
prohibition, in RCW 70.94.775(1), of outdoor fires containing petroleum
products and are not considered outdoor burning under RCW 70.94.743 through
70.94.780.

(7) To
provide for fire fighting instruction in instances not governed by subsection
(6) of this section, or other actions to protect public health and safety, the
department or a local air pollution control authority may issue permits that
allow limited burning of prohibited materials listed in RCW 70.94.775(1).

---
END ---