BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF
WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec.
1. A new section is added
to chapter 35.22 RCW to read as follows:

All cities
of the first class over one hundred fifty thousand population, that are located
on the interstate 5 corridor, that operate a council-manager form of
government, shall operate, maintain, and permanently staff a fireboat twenty-four
hours a day.

--- END ---