BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF
WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec.
1. It is the intent of the
legislature to protect the states' most vulnerable population, the aged, blind,
disabled, and mentally ill in the medicaid fee for service program. The
legislature finds that restricting patients' access to important prescription
drugs by means of unproven programs such as the proposed therapeutic
substitution program may jeopardize patients' health and result in higher costs
to the state from increased use of other medical services.

Sec. 2. RCW 74.09.010 and 1990 c
296 s 6 are each amended to read as follows:

As used in this
chapter:

(1) "Children's
health program" means the health care services program provided to
children under eighteen years of age and in households with incomes at or below
the federal poverty level as annually defined by the federal department of
health and human services as adjusted for family size, and who are not
otherwise eligible for medical assistance or the limited casualty program for
the medically needy.

(2) (("Committee"
means the children's health services committee created in section 3 of this
act.

(3))) "County" means the board of county
commissioners, county council, county executive, or tribal jurisdiction, or its
designee. A combination of two or more county authorities or tribal
jurisdictions may enter into joint agreements to fulfill the requirements of
RCW 74.09.415 through 74.09.435.

(((4))) (3)
"Department" means the department of social and health services.

(((5))) (4)
"Department of health" means the Washington state department of
health created pursuant to RCW 43.70.020.

(((6))) (5)
"Internal management" means the administration of medical assistance,
medical care services, the children's health program, and the limited casualty
program.

(((7))) (6)
"Limited casualty program" means the medical care program provided to
medically needy persons as defined under Title XIX of the federal social
security act, and to medically indigent persons who are without income or
resources sufficient to secure necessary medical services.

(((8))) (7)
"Medical assistance" means the federal aid medical care program
provided to categorically needy persons as defined under Title XIX of the
federal social security act.

(((9))) (8)
"Medical care services" means the limited scope of care financed by
state funds and provided to general assistance recipients, and recipients of
alcohol and drug addiction services provided under chapter 74.50 RCW.

(((10))) (9)
"Nursing home" means nursing home as defined in RCW 18.51.010.

(((11))) (10)
"Poverty" means the federal poverty level determined annually by the
United States department of health and human services, or successor agency.

(((12))) (11)
"Secretary" means the secretary of social and health services.

(12)
"Therapeutic substitution" means the dispensing of a therapeutic
alternative or preferred drug instead of the original drug product prescribed,
in accordance with either established written therapeutic interchange
guidelines or protocols from the prescriber for the pharmacist to follow or as
a result of a patient-specific consultation between the pharmacist and the
prescriber.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
3. A new section is added
to chapter 74.09 RCW to read as follows:

The
medical assistance administration shall not restrict access to prescription
medication through use of therapeutic substitution or other similar programs.

---
END ---