BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF
WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1. RCW 72.09.111 and 1999 c
325 s 2 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) The secretary shall
deduct from the gross wages or gratuities of each inmate working in
correctional industries work programs, taxes and legal financial obligations.
The secretary shall develop a formula for the distribution of offender wages
and gratuities.

(a) The formula shall
include the following minimum deductions from class I gross wages and from all
others earning at least minimum wage:

(i) Five percent to the
public safety and education account for the purpose of crime victims'
compensation;

(ii) Ten percent to a
department personal inmate savings account; and

(iii) Twenty percent to
the department to contribute to the cost of incarceration.

(b) The formula shall
include the following minimum deductions from class II gross gratuities:

(i) Five percent to the
public safety and education account for the purpose of crime victims'
compensation;

(ii) Ten percent to a
department personal inmate savings account; and

(iii) Fifteen percent
to the department to contribute to the cost of incarceration.

(c) The formula shall
include the following minimum deduction from class IV gross gratuities: Five
percent to the department to contribute to the cost of incarceration.

(d) The formula shall
include the following minimum deductions from class III gratuities: Five
percent for the purpose of crime victims' compensation.

Any person sentenced to
life imprisonment without possibility of release or parole under chapter 10.95
RCW or sentenced to death shall be exempt from the requirement under (a)(ii) or
(b)(ii) of this subsection.

The department personal
inmate savings account, together with any accrued interest, shall only be
available to an inmate at the time of his or her release from confinement,
unless the secretary determines that an emergency exists for the inmate, at
which time the funds can be made available to the inmate in an amount
determined by the secretary. The management of classes I, II, and IV
correctional industries may establish an incentive payment for offender workers
based on productivity criteria. This incentive shall be paid separately from
the hourly wage/gratuity rate and shall not be subject to the specified
deduction for cost of incarceration.

In the event that the
offender worker's wages or gratuity is subject to garnishment for support
enforcement, the crime victims' compensation, savings, and cost of
incarceration deductions shall be calculated on the net wages after taxes, legal
financial obligations, and garnishment.

(2) The department
shall explore other methods of recovering a portion of the cost of the inmate's
incarceration and for encouraging participation in work programs, including
development of incentive programs that offer inmates benefits and amenities
paid for only from wages earned while working in a correctional industries work
program.

(3) The department
shall develop the necessary administrative structure to recover inmates' wages
and keep records of the amount inmates pay for the costs of incarceration and
amenities. All funds deducted from inmate wages under subsection (1) of this
section for the purpose of contributions to the cost of incarceration shall be
deposited in a dedicated fund with the department and shall be used only for
the purpose of enhancing and maintaining correctional industries work programs.

(4) The expansion of
inmate employment in class I and class II correctional industries shall be
implemented according to the following schedule:

(a) Not later than June
30, 1995, the secretary shall achieve a net increase of at least two hundred in
the number of inmates employed in class I or class II correctional industries
work programs above the number so employed on June 30, 1994;

(b) Not later than June
30, 1996, the secretary shall achieve a net increase of at least four hundred
in the number of inmates employed in class I or class II correctional
industries work programs above the number so employed on June 30, 1994;

(c) Not later than June
30, 1997, the secretary shall achieve a net increase of at least six hundred in
the number of inmates employed in class I or class II correctional industries
work programs above the number so employed on June 30, 1994;

(d) Not later than June
30, 1998, the secretary shall achieve a net increase of at least nine hundred
in the number of inmates employed in class I or class II correctional
industries work programs above the number so employed on June 30, 1994;

(e) Not later than June
30, 1999, the secretary shall achieve a net increase of at least one thousand
two hundred in the number of inmates employed in class I or class II
correctional industries work programs above the number so employed on June 30,
1994;

(f) Not later than June
30, 2000, the secretary shall achieve a net increase of at least one thousand
five hundred in the number of inmates employed in class I or class II
correctional industries work programs above the number so employed on June 30,
1994; and

(g) For the period
June 30, 2000, through June 30, 2005, no fewer than two thousand six hundred
inmates shall be employed in class I or class II correctional industries work
programs. The number of inmates employed in class I or class II correctional
industries work programs may be increased to the extent of available funding.

(5) It
shall be in the discretion of the secretary to apportion the inmates between
class I and class II depending on available contracts and resources.

--- END ---