BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF
WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec.
1. A new section is added
to chapter 36.70A RCW to read as follows:

Development regulations
of a county or city controlling land uses within urban growth areas designated
under RCW 36.70A.110 may allow floating homes, floating aquatic residences, and
permanent residency aboard moored boats above any portion of aquatic lands in
the urban growth area, including on isolated docks or piers, if, at a minimum,
provisions for the following are made for each floating home, aquatic
residence, and boat onboard which permanent residency is allowed: (1) Effluent
removal and treatment; (2) a fire safety plan; (3) potable water supply; (4) a
verifiable address; (5) nearby solid waste collection; (6) nearby motor vehicle
parking space; and (7) life safety systems.

The county's or city's
local shoreline master program must be amended to be in concert with these
development regulations.

Sec. 2. RCW 79.90.465 and 1984 c
221 s 4 are each amended to read as follows:

The definitions in this
section apply throughout chapters 79.90 through 79.96 RCW.

(1)
"Water-dependent use" means a use which cannot logically exist in any
location but on the water. Examples include, but are not limited to,
water-borne commerce; terminal and transfer facilities; ferry terminals;
watercraft sales in conjunction with other water-dependent uses; watercraft
construction, repair, and maintenance; moorage and launching facilities;
aquaculture; log booming; ((and)) public fishing piers and parks; and
floating residences allowed under section 1 of this act.

(2)
"Water-oriented use" means a use which historically has been
dependent on a waterfront location, but with existing technology could be
located away from the waterfront. Examples include, but are not limited to,
wood products manufacturing, watercraft sales, fish processing, petroleum
refining, sand and gravel processing, and log storage((, and house
boats)). Other examples also include floating residences not located in
an area designated under section 1 of this act. For the purposes of
determining rent under this chapter, water-oriented uses shall be classified as
water-dependent uses if the activity either is conducted on state-owned aquatic
lands leased on October 1, 1984, or was actually conducted on the state-owned
aquatic lands for at least three years before October 1, 1984. If, after
October 1, 1984, the activity is changed to a use other than a water-dependent
use, the activity shall be classified as a nonwater-dependent use. If
continuation of the existing use requires leasing additional state-owned
aquatic lands and is permitted under the shoreline management act of 1971,
chapter 90.58 RCW, the department may allow reasonable expansion of the
water-oriented use.

(3)
"Nonwater-dependent use" means a use which can operate in a location
other than on the waterfront. Examples include, but are not limited to,
hotels, condominiums, apartments, restaurants, retail stores, and warehouses
not part of a marine terminal or transfer facility.

(4) "Log
storage" means the water storage of logs in rafts or otherwise prepared
for shipment in water-borne commerce, but does not include the temporary
holding of logs to be taken directly into a vessel or processing facility.

(5) "Log
booming" means placing logs into and taking them out of the water,
assembling and disassembling log rafts before or after their movement in
water-borne commerce, related handling and sorting activities taking place in
the water, and the temporary holding of logs to be taken directly into a
processing facility. "Log booming" does not include the temporary
holding of logs to be taken directly into a vessel.

(6)
"Department" means the department of natural resources.

(7) "Port
district" means a port district created under Title 53 RCW.

(8) The "real rate
of return" means the average for the most recent ten calendar years of the
average rate of return on conventional real property mortgages as reported by
the federal home loan bank board or any successor agency, minus the average
inflation rate for the most recent ten calendar years.

(9) The "inflation
rate" for a given year is the percentage rate of change in the previous
calendar year's all commodity producer price index of the bureau of labor
statistics of the United States department of commerce. If the index ceases to
be published, the department shall designate by rule a comparable substitute
index.

(10) "Public
utility lines" means pipes, conduits, and similar facilities for
distribution of water, electricity, natural gas, telephone, other electronic
communication, and sewers, including sewer outfall lines.

(11)
"Terminal" means a point of interchange between land and water
carriers, such as a pier, wharf, or group of such, equipped with facilities for
care and handling of cargo and/or passengers.

(12)
"State-owned aquatic lands" means those aquatic lands and waterways
administered by the department of natural resources or managed under RCW
79.90.475 by a port district. "State-owned aquatic lands" does not
include aquatic lands owned in fee by, or withdrawn for the use of, state
agencies other than the department of natural resources.

---
END ---