BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF
WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec.
1. (1) The state of
Washington faces many complex environmental issues requiring a well-informed
citizenry. Effective environmental education programs provide the foundation
for the development of environmentally literate children and adults, setting
the stage for lifelong learning. Furthermore, environmental education offers
many opportunities for achieving excellence in our schools. Well-designed programs,
integrated with the state's essential academic learning requirements, can
contribute to the state's educational reform goals. Recent studies have shown
that integrated, multidisciplinary environmental education programs provide the
following benefits:

(a) Better performance
on standardized measures of academic achievement in reading, writing, math,
science, and social studies;

(b) Increased
engagement and enthusiasm for learning;

(c) Reduced discipline
and classroom management problems; and

(d) Greater pride and
ownership in accomplishments.

(2) Therefore, the
purpose of the environmental education partnership trust fund is to further the
development of environmental education in the state by:

(a) Raising money from
public and private sources to fund environmental education initiatives and
programs throughout the state; and

(b) Disbursing the
money to programs through a competitive grant-making process with oversight
from a board of trustees managed in the office of the superintendent of public
instruction. These activities would include, but are not limited to:

(i) Developing a
statewide plan to set priorities for environmental education;

(ii) Encouraging the
development of environmental education projects in schools, outdoor learning
areas, communities, and businesses;

(iii) Enhancing
preservice training in environmental education for future educators;

(iv) Providing
continuing in-service training for educators;

(v) Providing for
transportation services to learning sites;

(vi) Supporting
conferences and meetings that focus on environmental education needs and
issues; and

(vii) Providing for the
purchase of equipment and supplies needed for the implementation of the
programs in this section.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
2. A new section is added
to chapter 28A.300 RCW to read as follows:

(1) The Washington
environmental education partnership fund is hereby created to provide
environmental education opportunities for teachers and students to meet the
Washington high school graduation requirements and to help achieve the highest
quality of excellence in education through compliance with the essential
academic learning requirements.

(2) Under the
partnership fund in this section, funds shall be disbursed through grants with
oversight from a board of trustees managed in the office of the superintendent
of public instruction.

(3) The board of
trustees, representing a diverse array of interests, backgrounds, and
geographical location, shall consist of thirteen members.

(4) Eleven members of
the board shall be appointed by the governor and include representation from:

(a) Tribal governments;

(b) Environmental
education practitioners;

(c) Environmental
organizations;

(d) Agriculture,
business, and industry;

(e) K-12 public and
private school administrators;

(f) K-12 public and
private school teachers;

(g) Nonformal education
institutions;

(h) Institutions of
higher education;

(i) Local governments;
and

(j) Parents.

(5) One member of the
board shall be a senator, appointed by the majority leader of the senate, and
one member of the board shall be a representative, appointed by the speaker of
the house of representatives.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
3. A new section is added
to chapter 28A.300 RCW to read as follows:

(1) Money raised from
public and private sources shall fund effective environmental education
activities throughout the state. These activities may include:

(a) Transportation for
students and teachers to education sites;

(b) Environmental
education projects, both in the classroom and outdoors;

(c) Preservice training
for future educators;

(d) In-service training
for educators; and

(e) Supplies needed for
implementation of the programs in this subsection (1).

(2) The board of
trustees shall establish and publish funding criteria. These criteria shall be
based on compliance with the essential academic learning requirements. The
criteria may also include environmental education programs with one or more of
the following features:

(a) Methods that
encourage critical thinking;

(b) Multidisciplinary
approaches to environmental issues;

(c) Service learning
components; and

(d)
Programs that target underserved and multicultural populations.

---
END ---