BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF
WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec.
1. A new section is added
to chapter 42.17 RCW to read as follows:

A county with a
population of one million or more, and a city with a population of five hundred
thousand or more, may establish a program where a candidate for a county or
city elected office voluntarily agrees to abide by limitations on the amount of
money the candidate, or the candidate's authorized committee, spends to
campaign for the office in return for receiving public matching funds from the
county or city that are used to assist in funding his or her campaign.

Sec. 2. RCW 42.17.128 and 1993 c
2 s 24 are each amended to read as follows:

Except
as provided under section 1 of this act, public funds, whether derived through
taxes, fees, penalties, or any other sources, shall not be used to finance
political campaigns for state or local office.

---
END ---