BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF
WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1. RCW 35.21.710 and 1983
2nd ex.s. c 3 s 33 are each amended to read as follows:

Any city which imposes
a license fee or tax upon business activities consisting of the making of
retail sales of tangible personal property which are measured by gross receipts
or gross income from such sales, shall impose such tax at a single uniform rate
upon all such business activities. The taxing authority granted to cities for
taxes upon business activities measured by gross receipts or gross income from
sales shall not exceed a rate of .0020; except that any city with an adopted
ordinance at a higher rate, as of January 1, 1982 shall be limited to a maximum
increase of ten percent of the January 1982 rate, not to exceed an annual
incremental increase of two percent of current rate: PROVIDED, That any
adopted ordinance which classifies according to different types of business or
services shall be subject to both the ten percent and the two percent annual
incremental increase limitation on each tax rate: PROVIDED FURTHER, That all
surtaxes on business and occupation classifications in effect as of January 1,
1982, shall expire no later than December 31, 1982, or by expiration date established
by local ordinance. Cities which impose a license fee or tax upon business
activities consisting of the making of retail sales of tangible personal
property which are measured by gross receipts or gross income from such sales
shall be required to submit an annual report to the state auditor identifying
the rate established and the revenues received from each fee or tax. This
section shall not apply to any business activities subject to the tax imposed
by chapter 82.16 RCW. For purposes of this section, the providing to consumers
of competitive telephone service, as defined in RCW 82.04.065, or the
providing of payphone service, shall be ((deemed to be the)) subject
to tax at the same rate as business activities consisting of the making of
retail sales of tangible personal property. As used in this section,
"payphone service" means making telephone service available to the
public on a fee-per-call basis, independent of any other commercial
transaction, for the purpose of making telephone calls, when the telephone can
only be activated by inserting coins, calling collect, using a calling card or
credit card, or dialing a toll-free number, and the provider of the service
owns or leases the telephone equipment but does not own the telephone line providing
the service to that equipment and has no affiliation with the owner of the
telephone line.

Sec. 2. RCW 35.21.712 and 1983
2nd ex.s. c 3 s 35 are each amended to read as follows:

Any city which imposes
a license fee or tax upon the business activity of engaging in the telephone
business, as defined in RCW 82.04.065, which is measured by gross receipts or
gross income from the business shall impose the tax at a uniform rate on all persons
engaged in the telephone business in the city.

This section does not
apply to the providing of competitive telephone service as defined in RCW
82.04.065 or to the providing of payphone service as defined in RCW
35.21.710.

Sec. 3. RCW 35A.82.050 and 1983
2nd ex.s. c 3 s 34 are each amended to read as follows:

Any code city which
imposes a license fee or tax upon business activities consisting of the making
of retail sales of tangible personal property which are measured by gross
receipts or gross income from such sales, shall impose such tax at a single
uniform rate upon all such business activities. This section shall not apply
to any business activities subject to the tax imposed by chapter 82.16 RCW.
For purposes of this section, the providing to consumers of competitive
telephone service, as defined in RCW 82.04.065, or the providing of payphone
service as defined in RCW 35.21.710, shall be ((deemed to be the)) subject
to tax at the same rate as business activities consisting of the making of
retail sales of tangible personal property.

Sec. 4. RCW 35A.82.055 and 1983
2nd ex.s. c 3 s 36 are each amended to read as follows:

Any code city which
imposes a license fee or tax upon the business activity of engaging in the
telephone business, as defined in RCW 82.04.065, which is measured by gross
receipts or gross income from the business shall impose the tax at a uniform
rate on all persons engaged in the telephone business in the code city.

This section does not
apply to the providing of competitive telephone service as defined in RCW
82.04.065 or to the providing of payphone service as defined in RCW
35.21.710.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 5. This act takes effect
July 1, 2002.

---
END ---