BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF
WASHINGTON:

_4 Sec. 1. RCW
9A.36.080 and 1993 c 127 s 2 are each amended to read

_5 as follows:

_6 (1) A person is guilty of malicious harassment if he
or she

_7 maliciously and intentionally commits one of the
following acts

_8 because of his or her perception of the victim's race,
color,

_9 religion, ancestry, national origin, gender, sexual
orientation,

10 or mental, physical, or sensory handicap:

11 (a) Causes physical injury to the victim or another
person;

12 (b) Causes physical damage to or destruction of the
property of

13 the victim or another person; or

14 (c) Threatens a specific person or group of persons
and places

15 that person, or members of the specific group of
persons, in

16 reasonable fear of harm to person or property. The fear
must be a

17 fear that a reasonable person would have under all the

18 circumstances. For purposes of this section, a
"reasonable

19 person" is a reasonable person who is a member of
the victim's

p. 1 HB
2032

_1 race, color, religion, ancestry, national origin,
gender, or

_2 sexual orientation, or who has the same mental,
physical, or

_3 sensory handicap as the victim. Words alone do not
constitute

_4 malicious harassment unless the context or circumstances

_5 surrounding the words indicate the words are a threat.
Threatening

_6 words do not constitute malicious harassment if it is
apparent to

_7 the victim that the person does not have the ability to
carry out

_8 the threat.

_9 (2) In any prosecution for malicious harassment,
unless

10 evidence exists which explains to the trier of fact's
satisfaction

11 that the person did not intend to threaten the victim or
victims,

12 the trier of fact may infer that the person intended to
threaten a

13 specific victim or group of victims because of the
person's

14 perception of the victim's or victims' race, color,
religion,

15 ancestry, national origin, gender, sexual orientation,
or mental,

16 physical, or sensory handicap if the person commits one
of the

17 following acts:

18 (a) Burns a cross on property of a victim who is or
whom the

19 actor perceives to be of African American heritage; or

20 (b) Defaces property of a victim who is or whom the
actor

21 perceives to be of Jewish heritage by defacing the
property with a

22 swastika.

23 This subsection only applies to the creation of a
reasonable

24 inference for evidentiary purposes. This subsection
does not

25 restrict the state's ability to prosecute a person under

26 subsection (1) of this section when the facts of a
particular case

27 do not fall within (a) or (b) of this subsection.

28 (3) It is not a defense that the accused was
mistaken that the

29 victim was a member of a certain race, color, religion,
ancestry,

30 national origin, gender, or sexual orientation, or had a
mental,

31 physical, or sensory handicap.

32 (4) Evidence of expressions or associations of the
accused may

33 not be introduced as substantive evidence at trial
unless the

34 evidence specifically relates to the crime charged.
Nothing in

35 this chapter shall affect the rules of evidence
governing

36 impeachment of a witness.

37 (5) Every person who commits another crime during
the

HB 2032 p. 2

_1 commission of a crime under this section may be punished
and

_2 prosecuted for the other crime separately.

_3 (6) "Sexual orientation" for the purposes
of this section means

_4 heterosexuali­ty, homosexuality, ((or))
bisexuality, and gender

_5 expression or identity.

_6 (7) Malicious harassment is a class C felony.

_7 (8) The penalties provided in this section for
malicious

_8 harassment do not preclude the victims from seeking any
other

_9 remedies otherwise available under law.

10 (9) Nothing in this section confers or expands any
civil rights

11 or protections to any group or class identified under
this

12 section, beyond those rights or protections that exist
under the

13 federal or state Constitution or the civil laws of the
state of

14 Washington.

‑‑‑ END ‑‑‑

p. 3 HB
2032