BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF
WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1. RCW 46.20.391 and 1999 c
274 s 4 and 1999 c 272 s 1 are each reenacted and amended to read as follows:

(1) Any person licensed
under this chapter who is convicted of an offense relating to motor vehicles
for which suspension or revocation of the driver's license is mandatory, other
than vehicular homicide or vehicular assault, or who has had his or her license
suspended under RCW 46.20.3101 (2)(a) or (3)(a), or a juvenile whose driving
privilege has been revoked under RCW 46.20.265 but who is otherwise qualified
to be licensed under this chapter, may submit to the department an
application for an occupational driver's license. The department, upon receipt
of the prescribed fee and upon determining that the petitioner is engaged in an
occupation ((or)), trade, apprenticeship, or on-the-job
training that makes it essential that the petitioner operate a motor
vehicle, may issue an occupational driver's license and may set definite
restrictions as provided in RCW 46.20.394. If transportation to and from a
place of employment is essential, an occupational license may be granted.
No person may petition for, and the department shall not issue, an occupational
driver's license that is effective during the first thirty days of any
suspension or revocation imposed either for a violation of RCW 46.61.502 or
46.61.504 or under RCW 46.20.3101 (2)(a) or (3)(a), or for both a violation of
RCW 46.61.502 or 46.61.504 and under RCW 46.20.3101 (2)(a) or (3)(a) where the
action arises from the same incident. A person aggrieved by the decision of
the department on the application for an occupational driver's license may
request a hearing as provided by rule of the department.

(2)(a) A person
licensed under this chapter whose driver's license is suspended administratively
due to failure to appear or pay a traffic ticket under RCW 46.20.289; a
violation of the financial responsibility laws under chapter 46.29 RCW; or for
multiple violations within a specified period of time under RCW 46.20.291, may
apply to the department for an occupational driver's license if the applicant
demonstrates to the satisfaction of the department that one of the following
additional conditions are met:

(i) The applicant is in
an apprenticeship program or an on-the-job training program for which a
driver's license is required;

(ii) The applicant
presents evidence that he or she has applied for a position in an
apprenticeship or on-the-job training program and the program has certified
that a driver's license is required to begin the program, provided that a
license granted under this provision shall be in effect no longer than fourteen
days;

(iii) The applicant is
in a program that assists persons who are enrolled in a WorkFirst program
pursuant to chapter 74.08A RCW to become gainfully employed and the program
requires a driver's license; or

(iv) The applicant is
undergoing substance abuse treatment or is participating in meetings of a
twelve-step group such as alcoholics anonymous.

(b) If the suspension
is for failure to respond, pay, or comply with a notice of traffic infraction
or conviction, the applicant must enter into a payment plan with the court.

(c) An occupational
driver's license issued to an applicant described in (a) of this subsection
shall be valid for the period of the suspension or revocation but not more than
two years.

(d) Upon receipt of
evidence that a holder of an occupational driver's license granted under this
subsection is no longer enrolled in an apprenticeship or on-the-job training
program, the director shall give written notice by first class mail to the
driver that the occupational driver's license shall be canceled. The effective
date of cancellation shall be fifteen days from the date of mailing the
notice. If at any time before the cancellation goes into effect the driver
submits evidence of continued enrollment in the program, the cancellation shall
be stayed. If the cancellation becomes effective, the driver may obtain, at no
additional charge, a new occupational driver's license upon submittal of evidence
of enrollment in another program that meets the criteria set forth in this
subsection.

(e) The department
shall not issue an occupational driver's license under (a)(iv) of this
subsection if the applicant is able to receive transit services sufficient to
allow for the applicant's participation in the programs referenced under
(a)(iv) of this subsection.

(3) An applicant for an
occupational driver's license is eligible to receive such license only if:

(a) Within one year
immediately preceding the date of the offense that gave rise to the present
conviction, the applicant has not committed any offense relating to motor
vehicles for which suspension or revocation of a driver's license is mandatory;
and

(b) Within seven years
immediately preceding the date of the offense that gave rise to the present
conviction or incident, the applicant has not committed any of the following
offenses: (i) Driving or being in actual physical control of a motor vehicle
while under the influence of intoxicating liquor; (ii) vehicular homicide under
RCW 46.61.520; or (iii) vehicular assault under RCW 46.61.522; and

(c) The applicant is
engaged in an occupation ((or)), trade, apprenticeship, or
on-the-job training that makes it essential that he or she operate a motor
vehicle, except as allowed under subsection (2)(a) of this section; and

(d) The applicant files
satisfactory proof of financial responsibility under chapter 46.29 RCW.

(4) The
director shall cancel an occupational driver's license upon receipt of notice
that the holder thereof has been convicted of operating a motor vehicle in
violation of its restrictions, or of a separate offense that under chapter
46.20 RCW would warrant suspension or revocation of a regular driver's
license. The cancellation is effective as of the date of the conviction, and
continues with the same force and effect as any suspension or revocation under
this title.

--- END ---