BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF
WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1. RCW 18.53.010 and 1989 c
36 s 1 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) The practice of
optometry is defined as the examination of the human eye, the examination and
ascertaining any defects of the human vision system and the analysis of the
process of vision. The practice of optometry may include, but not necessarily
be limited to, the following:

(a) The employment of
any objective or subjective means or method, including the use of drugs
((topically applied to the eye)), for diagnostic and therapeutic
purposes by those licensed under this chapter and who meet the requirements of
subsections (2) and (3) of this section, and the use of any diagnostic
instruments or devices for the examination or analysis of the human vision
system, the measurement of the powers or range of human vision, or the
determination of the refractive powers of the human eye or its functions in
general; and

(b) The prescription
and fitting of lenses, prisms, therapeutic or refractive contact lenses and the
adaption or adjustment of frames and lenses used in connection therewith; and

(c) The prescription
and provision of visual therapy, therapeutic aids, and other optical
devices((, and the treatment with topically applied drugs by those licensed
under this chapter and who meet the requirements of subsections (2) and (3) of
this section)); and

(d) The ascertainment
of the perceptive, neural, muscular, or pathological condition of the
visual system; and

(e) The adaptation of
prosthetic eyes.

(2)(a) Those
persons using drugs for diagnostic purposes in the practice of optometry shall
have a minimum of sixty hours of didactic and supervised clinical
instruction in general and ocular pharmacology as applied to optometry, ((and
for therapeutic purposes, an additional minimum of seventy-five hours of
didactic and clinical instruction)) as established by the board, and
certification from an institution of higher learning, accredited by those
agencies recognized by the United States office of education or the council on
postsecondary accreditation to qualify for certification by the optometry board
of Washington to use drugs for diagnostic and therapeutic purposes.

(b) Those persons
using or prescribing topical drugs for therapeutic purposes in the practice of
optometry shall be certified under (a) of this subsection, and shall have an
additional minimum of seventy-five hours of didactic and supervised clinical
instruction as established by the board, and certification from an institution
of higher learning, accredited by those agencies recognized by the United
States office of education or the council on postsecondary accreditation to
qualify for certification by the optometry board of Washington to use drugs for
therapeutic purposes.

(c) Those persons
using or prescribing drugs administered orally for therapeutic purposes in the
practice of optometry shall be certified under (b) of this subsection, and
shall have an additional minimum of sixteen hours of didactic and eight hours
of supervised clinical instruction as established by the board, and
certification from an institution of higher learning, accredited by those
agencies recognized by the United States office of education or the council on
postsecondary accreditation to qualify for certification by the optometry board
of Washington to administer, dispense, or prescribe oral drugs for therapeutic
purposes.

(d) Those persons
administering epinephrine by injection for treatment of anaphylactic shock in
the practice of optometry must be certified under (b) of this subsection and
must have an additional minimum of four hours of didactic and supervised
clinical instruction, as established by the board, and certification from an
institution of higher learning, accredited by those agencies recognized by the
United States office of education or the council on postsecondary accreditation
to qualify for certification by the optometry board to administer epinephrine
by injection.

(e) Such course
or courses shall be the fiscal responsibility of the participating and
attending optometrist.

(3) The board shall
establish a schedule of drugs for diagnostic and treatment purposes limited to
the practice of optometry, and no person licensed pursuant to this chapter
shall prescribe, dispense, purchase, possess, or administer drugs except as
authorized and to the extent permitted by the board.

(4) The board shall
establish a list of legend drugs and Schedule III through V controlled
substances, in consultation and with the approval of the board of pharmacy, and
no person licensed under this chapter shall prescribe, dispense, purchase,
possess, or administer these drugs except as authorized and to the extent
permitted by the board.

(a) The board, in
consultation and with the approval of the board of pharmacy, shall establish,
by rule, specific guidelines for the prescription and administration of drugs
by optometrists, so that licensed optometrists and persons filling their
prescriptions have a clear understanding of which drugs and which dosages or
forms are included in the authority granted by this section.

(b) No optometrist
shall prescribe, dispense, or administer a controlled substance for more than
seven days in treating a particular patient for a single trauma, episode, or
condition.

(c) No optometrist
may prescribe, dispense, or administer a controlled substance for treating pain
associated with an operative procedure during ninety days of postoperative
care, unless in consultation with the practitioner who performed the operative
procedure.

(d) The prescription
or administration of drugs as authorized in this section is specifically
limited to those drugs appropriate to treatment of diseases or conditions of
the human eye and its associated structure that are within the scope of
practice of optometry. The prescription or administration of drugs for any
other purpose is not authorized by this section.

(5) The board shall
develop a means of identification and verification of optometrists certified to
use therapeutic drugs for the purpose of issuing prescriptions as authorized by
this section.

(6) Nothing in this
chapter shall be construed to authorize: Administration of a drug by
injection, except epinephrine for treatment of anaphylactic shock; retinal
repair surgery, eximer laser, or laser in situ keratomileusis surgery; or the
use, prescription, dispensing, purchase, possession, or administration of any
Schedule I and II controlled substances. The provisions of this section shall
be strictly construed.

Sec. 2. RCW 18.53.140 and 1991 c
3 s 138 are each amended to read as follows:

It shall be unlawful
for any person:

(1) To sell or barter,
or offer to sell or barter any license issued by the secretary; or

(2) To purchase or
procure by barter any license with the intent to use the same as evidence of
the holder's qualification to practice optometry; or

(3) To alter with
fraudulent intent in any material regard such license; or

(4) To use or attempt
to use any such license which has been purchased, fraudulently issued,
counterfeited or materially altered as a valid license; or

(5) To practice
optometry under a false or assumed name, or as a representative or agent of any
person, firm or corporation with which the licensee has no connection:
PROVIDED, Nothing in this chapter nor in the optometry law shall make it
unlawful for any lawfully licensed optometrist or association of lawfully
licensed optometrists to practice optometry under the name of any lawfully
licensed optometrist who may transfer by inheritance or otherwise the right to
use such name; or

(6) To practice
optometry in this state either for him or herself or any other individual,
corporation, partnership, group, public or private entity, or any member of the
licensed healing arts without having at the time of so doing a valid license
issued by the secretary of health; or

(7) To in any manner
barter or give away as premiums either on his own account or as agent or
representative for any other purpose, firm or corporation, any eyeglasses,
spectacles, lenses or frames; or

(8) To use drugs in the
practice of optometry, except ((those topically applied for diagnostic or
therapeutic purposes)) as authorized under RCW 18.53.010; or

(9) To use advertising
whether printed, radio, display, or of any other nature, which is misleading or
inaccurate in any material particular, nor shall any such person in any way
misrepresent any goods or services (including but without limitation, its use,
trademark, grade, quality, size, origin, substance, character, nature, finish,
material, content, or preparation) or credit terms, values, policies, services,
or the nature or form of the business conducted; or

(10) To advertise the
"free examination of eyes," "free consultation,"
"consultation without obligation," "free advice," or any
words or phrases of similar import which convey the impression to the public
that eyes are examined free or of a character tending to deceive or mislead the
public, or in the nature of "bait advertising;" or

(11) To use an
advertisement of a frame or mounting which is not truthful in describing the
frame or mounting and all its component parts. Or advertise a frame or
mounting at a price, unless it shall be depicted in the advertisement without
lenses inserted, and in addition the advertisement must contain a statement
immediately following, or adjacent to the advertised price, that the price is
for frame or mounting only, and does not include lenses, eye examination and
professional services, which statement shall appear in type as large as that
used for the price, or advertise lenses or complete glasses, viz.: frame or
mounting with lenses included, at a price either alone or in conjunction with
professional services; or

(12) To use
advertising, whether printed, radio, display, or of any other nature, which
inaccurately lays claim to a policy or continuing practice of generally underselling
competitors; or

(13) To use
advertising, whether printed, radio, display or of any other nature which
refers inaccurately in any material particular to any competitors or their
goods, prices, values, credit terms, policies or services; or

(14) To use advertising
whether printed, radio, display, or of any other nature, which states any
definite amount of money as "down payment" and any definite amount of
money as a subsequent payment, be it daily, weekly, monthly, or at the end of
any period of time.

Sec. 3. RCW 69.41.030 and 1996 c
178 s 17 are each amended to read as follows:

It shall be unlawful
for any person to sell, deliver, or possess any legend drug except upon the
order or prescription of a physician under chapter 18.71 RCW, an osteopathic
physician and surgeon under chapter 18.57 RCW, an optometrist licensed under
chapter 18.53 RCW who is certified by the optometry board under RCW 18.53.010,
a dentist under chapter 18.32 RCW, a podiatric physician and surgeon under
chapter 18.22 RCW, a veterinarian under chapter 18.92 RCW, a commissioned
medical or dental officer in the United States armed forces or public health
service in the discharge of his or her official duties, a duly licensed
physician or dentist employed by the veterans administration in the discharge
of his or her official duties, a registered nurse or advanced registered nurse
practitioner under chapter 18.79 RCW when authorized by the nursing care
quality assurance commission, an osteopathic physician assistant under chapter
18.57A RCW when authorized by the board of osteopathic medicine and surgery, a
physician assistant under chapter 18.71A RCW when authorized by the medical
quality assurance commission, a physician licensed to practice medicine and
surgery or a physician licensed to practice osteopathic medicine and surgery,
a dentist licensed to practice dentistry, a podiatric physician and surgeon
licensed to practice podiatric medicine and surgery, or a veterinarian licensed
to practice veterinary medicine, in any province of Canada which shares a
common border with the state of Washington or in any state of the United
States: PROVIDED, HOWEVER, That the above provisions shall not apply to sale,
delivery, or possession by drug wholesalers or drug manufacturers, or their
agents or employees, or to any practitioner acting within the scope of his or
her license, or to a common or contract carrier or warehouseman, or any
employee thereof, whose possession of any legend drug is in the usual course of
business or employment: PROVIDED FURTHER, That nothing in this chapter or
chapter 18.64 RCW shall prevent a family planning clinic that is under contract
with the department of social and health services from selling, delivering,
possessing, and dispensing commercially prepackaged oral contraceptives
prescribed by authorized, licensed health care practitioners.

Sec. 4. RCW 69.50.101 and 1998 c
222 s 3 are each amended to read as follows:

Unless the context
clearly requires otherwise, definitions of terms shall be as indicated where
used in this chapter:

(a)
"Administer" means to apply a controlled substance, whether by
injection, inhalation, ingestion, or any other means, directly to the body of a
patient or research subject by:

(1) a practitioner
authorized to prescribe (or, by the practitioner's authorized agent); or

(2) the patient or
research subject at the direction and in the presence of the practitioner.

(b) "Agent"
means an authorized person who acts on behalf of or at the direction of a
manufacturer, distributor, or dispenser. It does not include a common or
contract carrier, public warehouseperson, or employee of the carrier or
warehouseperson.

(c) "Board"
means the state board of pharmacy.

(d) "Controlled
substance" means a drug, substance, or immediate precursor included in
Schedules I through V as set forth in federal or state laws, or federal or
board rules.

(e)(1) "Controlled
substance analog" means a substance the chemical structure of which is
substantially similar to the chemical structure of a controlled substance in
Schedule I or II and:

(i) that has a
stimulant, depressant, or hallucinogenic effect on the central nervous system
substantially similar to the stimulant, depressant, or hallucinogenic effect on
the central nervous system of a controlled substance included in Schedule I or
II; or

(ii) with respect to a
particular individual, that the individual represents or intends to have a
stimulant, depressant, or hallucinogenic effect on the central nervous system
substantially similar to the stimulant, depressant, or hallucinogenic effect on
the central nervous system of a controlled substance included in Schedule I or
II.

(2) The term does not
include:

(i) a controlled
substance;

(ii) a substance for
which there is an approved new drug application;

(iii) a substance with
respect to which an exemption is in effect for investigational use by a
particular person under Section 505 of the federal Food, Drug and Cosmetic Act,
21 U.S.C. Sec. 355, to the extent conduct with respect to the substance is
pursuant to the exemption; or

(iv) any substance to
the extent not intended for human consumption before an exemption takes effect
with respect to the substance.

(f) "Deliver"
or "delivery," means the actual or constructive transfer from one
person to another of a substance, whether or not there is an agency
relationship.

(g)
"Department" means the department of health.

(h)
"Dispense" means the interpretation of a prescription or order for a
controlled substance and, pursuant to that prescription or order, the proper
selection, measuring, compounding, labeling, or packaging necessary to prepare
that prescription or order for delivery.

(i) "Dispenser"
means a practitioner who dispenses.

(j)
"Distribute" means to deliver other than by administering or
dispensing a controlled substance.

(k)
"Distributor" means a person who distributes.

(l) "Drug"
means (1) a controlled substance recognized as a drug in the official United
States pharmacopoeia/national formulary or the official homeopathic
pharmacopoeia of the United States, or any supplement to them; (2) controlled
substances intended for use in the diagnosis, cure, mitigation, treatment, or prevention
of disease in individuals or animals; (3) controlled substances (other than
food) intended to affect the structure or any function of the body of
individuals or animals; and (4) controlled substances intended for use as a
component of any article specified in (1), (2), or (3) of this subsection. The
term does not include devices or their components, parts, or accessories.

(m) "Drug
enforcement administration" means the drug enforcement administration in
the United States Department of Justice, or its successor agency.

(n) "Immediate
precursor" means a substance:

(1) that the state
board of pharmacy has found to be and by rule designates as being the principal
compound commonly used, or produced primarily for use, in the manufacture of a
controlled substance;

(2) that is an
immediate chemical intermediary used or likely to be used in the manufacture of
a controlled substance; and

(3) the control of
which is necessary to prevent, curtail, or limit the manufacture of the
controlled substance.

(o) "Isomer"
means an optical isomer, but in RCW 69.50.101(r)(5), 69.50.204(a) (12) and
(34), and 69.50.206(a)(4), the term includes any geometrical isomer; in RCW
69.50.204(a) (8) and (42), and 69.50.210(c) the term includes any positional
isomer; and in RCW 69.50.204(a)(35), 69.50.204(c), and 69.50.208(a) the term
includes any positional or geometric isomer.

(p)
"Manufacture" means the production, preparation, propagation,
compounding, conversion, or processing of a controlled substance, either
directly or indirectly or by extraction from substances of natural origin, or
independently by means of chemical synthesis, or by a combination of extraction
and chemical synthesis, and includes any packaging or repackaging of the
substance or labeling or relabeling of its container. The term does not
include the preparation, compounding, packaging, repackaging, labeling, or
relabeling of a controlled substance:

(1) by a practitioner
as an incident to the practitioner's administering or dispensing of a
controlled substance in the course of the practitioner's professional practice;
or

(2) by a practitioner,
or by the practitioner's authorized agent under the practitioner's supervision,
for the purpose of, or as an incident to, research, teaching, or chemical
analysis and not for sale.

(q)
"Marijuana" or "marihuana" means all parts of the plant
Cannabis, whether growing or not; the seeds thereof; the resin extracted from
any part of the plant; and every compound, manufacture, salt, derivative,
mixture, or preparation of the plant, its seeds or resin. The term does not
include the mature stalks of the plant, fiber produced from the stalks, oil or
cake made from the seeds of the plant, any other compound, manufacture, salt,
derivative, mixture, or preparation of the mature stalks (except the resin
extracted therefrom), fiber, oil, or cake, or the sterilized seed of the plant
which is incapable of germination.

(r) "Narcotic
drug" means any of the following, whether produced directly or indirectly
by extraction from substances of vegetable origin, or independently by means of
chemical synthesis, or by a combination of extraction and chemical synthesis:

(1) Opium, opium
derivative, and any derivative of opium or opium derivative, including their
salts, isomers, and salts of isomers, whenever the existence of the salts,
isomers, and salts of isomers is possible within the specific chemical
designation. The term does not include the isoquinoline alkaloids of opium.

(2) Synthetic opiate
and any derivative of synthetic opiate, including their isomers, esters,
ethers, salts, and salts of isomers, esters, and ethers, whenever the existence
of the isomers, esters, ethers, and salts is possible within the specific
chemical designation.

(3) Poppy straw and
concentrate of poppy straw.

(4) Coca leaves, except
coca leaves and extracts of coca leaves from which cocaine, ecgonine, and
derivatives or ecgonine or their salts have been removed.

(5) Cocaine, or any
salt, isomer, or salt of isomer thereof.

(6) Cocaine base.

(7) Ecgonine, or any
derivative, salt, isomer, or salt of isomer thereof.

(8) Any compound,
mixture, or preparation containing any quantity of any substance referred to in
subparagraphs (1) through (7).

(s) "Opiate"
means any substance having an addiction-forming or addiction-sustaining
liability similar to morphine or being capable of conversion into a drug having
addiction-forming or addiction-sustaining liability. The term includes opium,
substances derived from opium (opium derivatives), and synthetic opiates. The
term does not include, unless specifically designated as controlled under RCW
69.50.201, the dextrorotatory isomer of 3-methoxy-n-methylmorphinan and its
salts (dextromethorphan). The term includes the racemic and levorotatory forms
of dextromethorphan.

(t) "Opium
poppy" means the plant of the species Papaver somniferum L., except its
seeds.

(u) "Person"
means individual, corporation, business trust, estate, trust, partnership,
association, joint venture, government, governmental subdivision or agency, or
any other legal or commercial entity.

(v) "Poppy
straw" means all parts, except the seeds, of the opium poppy, after
mowing.

(w)
"Practitioner" means:

(1) A physician under
chapter 18.71 RCW, a physician assistant under chapter 18.71A RCW, an
osteopathic physician and surgeon under chapter 18.57 RCW, an optometrist
licensed under chapter 18.53 RCW who is certified by the optometry board under
RCW 18.53.010 subject to any limitations in RCW 18.53.010, a dentist under
chapter 18.32 RCW, a podiatric physician and surgeon under chapter 18.22 RCW, a
veterinarian under chapter 18.92 RCW, a registered nurse, advanced registered
nurse practitioner, or licensed practical nurse under chapter 18.79 RCW, a
pharmacist under chapter 18.64 RCW or a scientific investigator under this
chapter, licensed, registered or otherwise permitted insofar as is consistent
with those licensing laws to distribute, dispense, conduct research with
respect to or administer a controlled substance in the course of their
professional practice or research in this state.

(2) A pharmacy,
hospital or other institution licensed, registered, or otherwise permitted to
distribute, dispense, conduct research with respect to or to administer a
controlled substance in the course of professional practice or research in this
state.

(3) A physician
licensed to practice medicine and surgery, a physician licensed to practice
osteopathic medicine and surgery, a dentist licensed to practice dentistry, a
podiatric physician and surgeon licensed to practice podiatric medicine and
surgery, or a veterinarian licensed to practice veterinary medicine in any
state of the United States.

(x) "Prescription"
means an order for controlled substances issued by a practitioner duly
authorized by law or rule in the state of Washington to prescribe controlled
substances within the scope of his or her professional practice for a
legitimate medical purpose.

(y)
"Production" includes the manufacturing, planting, cultivating,
growing, or harvesting of a controlled substance.

(z)
"Secretary" means the secretary of health or the secretary's
designee.

(aa) "State,"
unless the context otherwise requires, means a state of the United States, the
District of Columbia, the Commonwealth of Puerto Rico, or a territory or
insular possession subject to the jurisdiction of the United States.

(bb) "Ultimate
user" means an individual who lawfully possesses a controlled substance
for the individual's own use or for the use of a member of the individual's
household or for administering to an animal owned by the individual or by a
member of the individual's household.

(cc) "Electronic
communication of prescription information" means the communication of
prescription information by computer, or the transmission of an exact visual
image of a prescription by facsimile, or other electronic means for original
prescription information or prescription refill information for a Schedule
III-V controlled substance between an authorized practitioner and a pharmacy or
the transfer of prescription information for a controlled substance from one
pharmacy to another pharmacy.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 5. If any provision of this
act or its application to any person or circumstance is held invalid, the
remainder of the act or the application of the provision to other persons or
circumstances is not affected.

---
END ---