BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF
WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1. RCW 2.06.040 and 1987 c
43 s 1 are each amended to read as follows:

The court shall sit in
panels of three judges and decisions shall be rendered by not less than a
majority of the panel. In the determination of causes all decisions of the
court shall be given in writing and the grounds of the decisions shall be
stated. All decisions of the court ((having precedential value)) shall
be published as opinions of the court. ((Each panel shall determine whether
a decision of the court has sufficient precedential value to be published as an
opinion of the court. Decisions determined not to have precedential value
shall not be published.)) Panels in the first division shall be comprised
of such judges as the chief judge thereof shall from time to time direct.
Judges of the respective divisions may sit in other divisions and causes may be
transferred between divisions, as directed by written order of the chief
justice. The court may hold sessions in cities as may be designated by rule.

No judge of the court
shall be entitled to per diem or mileage for services performed at either his or
her legal residence or the headquarters of the division of the court of
which he or she is a member.

The court
may establish rules supplementary to and not in conflict with rules of the
supreme court.

--- END ---