BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF
WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec.
1. A new section is added
to chapter 90.48 RCW to read as follows:

Rules adopted by the
department under RCW 90.48.260 that may impact a federal reclamation project
constructed by the United States in accordance with state and federal law shall
be consistent with authorized project purposes and shall not impair authorized
project contracts or interfere with the construction, operation, or maintenance
of project facilities.

The department shall,
cooperatively with the United States bureau of reclamation and federal
reclamation project irrigation districts, adopt water quality classifications
for agriculture and warm water fisheries, adopt rules that consider and reflect
the use of constructed storage and conveyance facilities and other water
transport systems used for authorized project purposes, and adopt rules that
consider and reflect the unique site-specific characteristics of the arid and
semiarid regions of the state of Washington where federal reclamation projects
are located.

Sec. 2. RCW 77.55.100 and 2000 c
107 s 16 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) In the event that
any person or government agency desires to construct any form of hydraulic
project or perform other work that will use, divert, obstruct, or change the
natural flow or bed of any of the salt or fresh waters of the state, such
person or government agency shall, before commencing construction or work
thereon and to ensure the proper protection of fish life, secure the approval
of the department as to the adequacy of the means proposed for the protection
of fish life. This approval shall not be unreasonably withheld.

(2)(a) The department
shall grant or deny approval of a standard permit within forty-five calendar
days of the receipt of a complete application and notice of compliance with any
applicable requirements of the state environmental policy act, made in the
manner prescribed in this section.

(b) The applicant may
document receipt of application by filing in person or by registered mail. A
complete application for approval shall contain general plans for the overall
project, complete plans and specifications of the proposed construction or work
within the mean higher high water line in salt water or within the ordinary
high water line in fresh water, and complete plans and specifications for the
proper protection of fish life.

(c) The forty-five day
requirement shall be suspended if:

(i) After ten working
days of receipt of the application, the applicant remains unavailable or unable
to arrange for a timely field evaluation of the proposed project;

(ii) The site is
physically inaccessible for inspection; or

(iii) The applicant
requests delay. Immediately upon determination that the forty-five day period
is suspended, the department shall notify the applicant in writing of the
reasons for the delay.

(d) For purposes of
this section, "standard permit" means a written permit issued by the
department when the conditions under subsections (3) and (5)(b) of this section
are not met.

(3)(a) The department
may issue an expedited written permit in those instances where normal permit
processing would result in significant hardship for the applicant or
unacceptable damage to the environment. In cases of imminent danger, the department
shall issue an expedited written permit, upon request, for work to repair
existing structures, move obstructions, restore banks, protect property, or
protect fish resources. Expedited permit requests require a complete written
application as provided in subsection (2)(b) of this section and shall be
issued within fifteen calendar days of the receipt of a complete written
application. Approval of an expedited permit is valid for up to sixty days
from the date of issuance.

(b) For the purposes of
this subsection, "imminent danger" means a threat by weather, water
flow, or other natural conditions that is likely to occur within sixty days of
a request for a permit application.

(c) The department may
not require the provisions of the state environmental policy act, chapter
43.21C RCW, to be met as a condition of issuing a permit under this subsection.

(d) The department or
the county legislative authority may determine if an imminent danger exists.
The county legislative authority shall notify the department, in writing, if it
determines that an imminent danger exists.

(4) Approval of a
standard permit is valid for a period of up to five years from date of
issuance. The permittee must demonstrate substantial progress on construction
of that portion of the project relating to the approval within two years of the
date of issuance. If the department denies approval, the department shall
provide the applicant, in writing, a statement of the specific reasons why and
how the proposed project would adversely affect fish life. Protection of fish
life shall be the only ground upon which approval may be denied or
conditioned. Chapter 34.05 RCW applies to any denial of project approval,
conditional approval, or requirements for project modification upon which
approval may be contingent.

(5)(a) In case of an
emergency arising from weather or stream flow conditions or other natural
conditions, the department, through its authorized representatives, shall issue
immediately, upon request, oral approval for removing any obstructions,
repairing existing structures, restoring stream banks, or to protect property
threatened by the stream or a change in the stream flow without the necessity
of obtaining a written approval prior to commencing work. Conditions of an
oral approval to protect fish life shall be established by the department and
reduced to writing within thirty days and complied with as provided for in this
section. Oral approval shall be granted immediately, upon request, for a
stream crossing during an emergency situation.

(b) For purposes of
this section and RCW 77.55.110, "emergency" means an immediate threat
to life, the public, property, or of environmental degradation.

(c) The department or
the county legislative authority may declare and continue an emergency when one
or more of the criteria under (b) of this subsection are met. The county
legislative authority shall immediately notify the department if it declares an
emergency under this subsection.

(6) The department
shall, at the request of a county, develop five-year maintenance approval
agreements, consistent with comprehensive flood control management plans
adopted under the authority of RCW 86.12.200, or other watershed plan approved
by a county legislative authority, to allow for work on public and private
property for bank stabilization, bridge repair, removal of sand bars and
debris, channel maintenance, and other flood damage repair and reduction
activity under agreed-upon conditions and times without obtaining permits for
specific projects.

(7) This section shall
not apply to the construction of any form of hydraulic project or other work
which diverts water for agricultural irrigation or stock watering purposes
authorized under or recognized as being valid by the state's water codes, or
when such hydraulic project or other work is associated with streambank
stabilization to protect farm and agricultural land as defined in RCW
84.34.020. These irrigation or stock watering diversion and streambank
stabilization projects shall be governed by RCW 77.55.110.

A landscape management
plan approved by the department and the department of natural resources under
RCW 76.09.350(2), shall serve as a hydraulic project approval for the life of
the plan if fish are selected as one of the public resources for coverage under
such a plan.

(8) For the purposes of
this section and RCW 77.55.110, "bed" means the land below the
ordinary high water lines of state waters. ((This definition does not
include irrigation ditches, canals, storm water run-off devices, or other
artificial watercourses except where they exist in a natural watercourse that
has been altered by man.)) "Bed" and "waters of the
state" do not include irrigation canals, ditches, facilities, laterals,
drainage ditches, wasteways, storm water run-off facilities or other
artificial, man-altered watercourses that use natural watercourses if the
natural watercourse, before irrigation development or being altered by man,
only conveyed storm event or intermittent, seasonal run-off, or snowmelt and
would not, before irrigation development or alteration, have for at least
twelve months each year contained fish life.

(9) The
phrase "to construct any form of hydraulic project or perform other
work" does not include the act of driving across an established ford.
Driving across streams or on wetted stream beds at areas other than established
fords requires approval. Work within the ordinary high water line of state
waters to construct or repair a ford or crossing requires approval.

---
END ---