BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF
WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec.
1. A new section is added
to chapter 90.14 RCW to read as follows:

For the purposes of RCW
90.14.140 through 90.14.180, unless the context clearly requires otherwise,
"voluntarily fails" means the nonuse of all or a portion of the water
by the owner of the water right, where the nonuse occurs as a result of factors
within the control of the water user. A failure to use all or a portion of a
water right for irrigation use is involuntary when the water needed for
irrigation use under the right is reduced as a result of:

(1) Varying weather
conditions including but not limited to precipitation and temperature, so long
as the water user's diversion and delivery facilities are maintained in good
operating condition consistent with the beneficial use of the full amount of
the water right. The burden is on the water user to prove that the weather
conditions are significantly different from average conditions such that they
resulted in the reduction of water use;

(2) The temporary
presence of return flows used in lieu of water from the primary source of water
supply under the right if the return flows are measured or reliably estimated
using a scientific methodology accepted as reliable by the director of the
department of ecology; or

(3) Crop rotation.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
2. If any provision of this
act or its application to any person or circumstance is held invalid, the
remainder of the act or the application of the provision to other persons or
circumstances is not affected.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 3. This act is necessary for
the immediate preservation of the public peace, health, or safety, or support
of the state government and its existing public institutions, and takes effect
immediately.

---
END ---