BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF
WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1. RCW 36.96.040 and 1979
ex.s. c 5 s 4 are each amended to read as follows:

After such hearings,
the county legislative authority shall make written findings whether each of
the special purpose districts that was a subject of the hearings meets each of
the criteria of being "inactive." Whenever a special purpose
district other than a public utility district has been found to meet a
criterion of being inactive, or a public utility district has been found to
meet both criteria of being inactive, the county legislative authority shall
adopt an ordinance dissolving the special purpose district if it also makes
additional written findings detailing why it is in the public interest that the
special purpose district be dissolved. Except for the purpose of winding up
its affairs as provided by this chapter, a special purpose district that is so
dissolved shall cease to exist and the authority and obligation to carry out
the purposes for which it was created shall cease thirty-one days after
adoption of the dissolution ordinance.

Sec. 2. RCW 36.96.070 and 1979
ex.s. c 5 s 7 are each amended to read as follows:

Any moneys
or funds of the dissolved special purpose district and any moneys or funds
received by the board of trustees from the sale or other disposition of any
property of the dissolved special purpose district shall be used, to the extent
necessary, for the payment or settlement of any outstanding obligations of the
dissolved special purpose district. Any remaining moneys or funds shall be
used to pay the county legislative authority for all costs and expenses
incurred in the dissolution and liquidation of the dissolved special purpose
district. Thereafter, any remaining moneys, funds, or property shall become
that of the county in which the dissolved special purpose district was
located((: PROVIDED, That)). However, if the territory of the
dissolved special purpose district was located within more than one county, the
remaining moneys, funds, and personal property shall be apportioned and
distributed to each county in the proportion that the geographical area of the
dissolved special purpose district within the county bears to the total
geographical area of the dissolved special purpose district, and any remaining
real property or improvements to real property shall be transferred to the
county within whose boundaries it lies. A county to which real property or
improvements to real property are transferred under this section does not have
an obligation to use the property or improvements for the purposes for which
the dissolved special purpose district used the property or improvements and
the county does not assume the obligations or liabilities of the dissolved
special purpose district as a result of the transfer.

Sec. 3. RCW 85.38.220 and 1986 c
278 s 10 are each amended to read as follows:

Any special district
may have its operations suspended as provided in this section. The process of
suspending a special district's operations may be initiated by: (1) The
adoption of a resolution proposing such action by the governing body of the
special district; (2) the filing of a petition proposing such action with the
county legislative authority of the county in which all or the largest portion
of the special district is located, which petition is signed by voters of the
special district who own at least ten percent of the acreage in the special
district or is signed by ten or more voters of the special district; or (3) the
adoption of a resolution proposing such action by the county legislative
authority of the county in which all or the largest portion of the special
district is located.

A public hearing on the
proposed action shall be held by the county legislative authority at which it
shall inquire into whether such action is in the public interest. Notice of
the public hearing shall be published in a newspaper of general circulation in
the special district, posted in at least four locations in the special district
to attract the attention of the public, and mailed to the members of the
governing body of the special district, if there are any. After the public
hearing, the county legislative authority may adopt a resolution suspending the
operations of the special district if it finds such suspension to be in the
public interest. When a special district is located in more than one county,
the legislative authority of each of such counties must so act before the
operations of the special district are suspended.

After holding a public
hearing on the proposed reactivation of a special district that has had its
operations suspended, the legislative authority or authorities of the county or
counties in which the special district is located may reactivate the special
district by adopting a resolution finding such action to be in the public
interest. Notice of the public hearing shall be posted and published as
provided for the public hearing on a proposed suspension of a special
district's operations. The governing body of a reactivated special district
shall be appointed as in a newly created special district.

No special
district that owns drainage or flood control improvements may be ((dissolved))
suspended unless the legislative authority of a county accepts
responsibility for operation and maintenance of the improvements during the
suspension period.

Sec. 4. RCW 85.38.225 and 1991 c
28 s 2 are each amended to read as follows:

As an alternative to
this chapter a drainage district or drainage improvement district located
within the boundaries of a county storm drainage and surface water management
utility, and which is not currently imposing assessments, may be dissolved by
ordinance of the county legislative authority. If the alternative dissolution
procedure in this section is used the following shall apply:

(1) The county storm
drainage and surface water management utility shall assume responsibility for
payment or settlement of outstanding debts of the dissolved drainage district
or drainage improvement district.

(2) All assets,
including money, funds, improvements, or property, real or personal, shall
become assets of the county in which the dissolved drainage district or
drainage improvement district was located.

(3)
Notwithstanding RCW 85.38.220, the county storm drainage and surface water
management utility may determine how to best manage, operate, maintain,
improve, exchange, sell, or otherwise dispose of all property, real and
personal, of the dissolved drainage district or drainage improvement district,
and may determine to modify, cease the operation of, and/or remove any or all
facilities or improvements to real property of the dissolved drainage district
or drainage improvement district.

---
END ---