BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF
WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1. RCW 67.16.102 and 1991 c
270 s 5 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) Notwithstanding any
other provision of chapter 67.16 RCW to the contrary the licensee shall
withhold and shall pay daily to the commission, in addition to the percentages
authorized by RCW 67.16.105, one percent of the gross receipts of all
parimutuel machines at each race meet which sums shall, at the end of each
meet, be paid by the commission to the licensed owners of those horses
finishing first, second, third and fourth Washington bred only at each meet
from which the additional one percent is derived in accordance with an
equitable distribution formula to be promulgated by the commission prior to the
commencement of each race meet: PROVIDED, That nothing in this section shall
apply to race meets which are nonprofit in nature, are of ten days or less, and
have an average daily handle of less than one hundred twenty thousand dollars:
PROVIDED, That the additional one percent of the gross receipts of all
parimutuel machines at each race meet and the amount retained by the commission
as specified in RCW 67.16.100(1)(((a))) shall be deposited daily in a
time deposit by the commission and the interest derived therefrom shall be
distributed annually on an equal basis to those race courses at which
independent race meets are held which are nonprofit in nature and are of ten
days or less: PROVIDED, That prior to receiving a payment under this section
any new race course shall meet the qualifications set forth in this section for
a period of two years: PROVIDED, FURTHER, That said distributed funds shall be
used for the purpose of maintaining and upgrading the respective racing courses
and equine quartering areas of said nonprofit meets. The commission shall not
permit the licensees to take into consideration the benefits derived from this
section in establishing purses.

(2) The commission is
authorized to pay at the end of the calendar year one-half of the one percent
collected from a new licensee under subsection (1) of this section for
reimbursement of capital construction of that new licensee's new race track for
a period of ((five)) fifteen years. This reimbursement does not
include interest earned on that one-half of one percent and such interest shall
continue to be collected and disbursed as provided in RCW 67.16.101 and
subsection (1) of this section.

Sec. 2. RCW 67.16.175 and 1991 c
270 s 9 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) In addition to the
amounts authorized to be retained in RCW 67.16.170, race meets may retain daily
for each authorized day of racing an additional six percent of the daily gross
receipts of all parimutuel machines from exotic wagers at each race meet.

(2) Of the amounts
retained in subsection (1) of this section, one-sixth shall be used for
Washington-bred breeder awards.

(3) Of the amounts
retained for breeder awards under subsection (2) of this section, twenty-five
percent shall be retained by a new licensee for reimbursement of capital
construction of the new licensee's new race track for a period of ((five))
fifteen years.

(4) As
used in this section, "exotic wagers" means any multiple wager.
Exotic wagers are subject to approval of the commission.

---
END ---