BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF
WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1. RCW 74.39A.060 and 1999
c 176 s 34 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) The aging and adult
services administration of the department shall establish and maintain a
toll-free telephone number for receiving complaints regarding a facility that
the administration licenses or with which it contracts for long-term care
services.

(2) All facilities that
are licensed by, or that contract with the aging and adult services
administration to provide chronic long-term care services shall post in a place
and manner clearly visible to residents and visitors the department's toll-free
complaint telephone number and the toll-free number and program description of
the long-term care ombudsman as provided by RCW 43.190.050.

(3) The aging and adult
services administration shall investigate complaints if the subject of the
complaint is within its authority unless the department determines that: (a)
The complaint is intended to willfully harass a licensee or employee of the
licensee; or (b) there is no reasonable basis for investigation; or (c)
corrective action has been taken as determined by the ombudsman or the
department.

(4) The aging and adult
services administration shall refer complaints to appropriate state agencies,
law enforcement agencies, the attorney general, the long-term care ombudsman,
or other entities if the department lacks authority to investigate or if its
investigation reveals that a follow-up referral to one or more of these
entities is appropriate.

(5) The department
shall adopt rules that include the following complaint investigation protocols:

(a) Upon receipt of a
complaint, the department shall make a preliminary review of the complaint,
assess the severity of the complaint, and assign an appropriate response time.
Complaints involving imminent danger to the health, safety, or well-being of a
resident must be responded to within two days. When appropriate, the
department shall make an on-site investigation within a reasonable time after
receipt of the complaint or otherwise ensure that complaints are responded to.

(b) The complainant
must be: Promptly contacted by the department, unless anonymous or unavailable
despite several attempts by the department, and informed of the right to
discuss the alleged violations with the inspector and to provide other
information the complainant believes will assist the inspector; informed of the
department's course of action; and informed of the right to receive a written
copy of the investigation report.

(c) In conducting the
investigation, the department shall interview the complainant, unless
anonymous, and shall use its best efforts to interview the vulnerable adult or
adults allegedly harmed, and, consistent with the protection of the vulnerable
adult shall interview facility staff, any available independent sources of
relevant information, including if appropriate the family members of the
vulnerable adult.

(d) Substantiated
complaints involving harm to a resident, if an applicable law or rule has been
violated, shall be subject to one or more of the actions provided in RCW
74.39A.080 or 70.128.160. Whenever appropriate, the department shall also give
consultation and technical assistance to the provider.

(e) ((In the best
practices of total quality management and continuous quality improvement, after
a department finding of a violation that is serious, recurring, or uncorrected
following a previous citation, the department shall make an on-site revisit of
the facility to ensure correction of the violation, except for license or
contract suspensions or revocations.)) After a department finding of a
violation for which a stop placement has been imposed, the department shall
make an on-site revisit of the provider within fifteen working days from the
request for revisit, to ensure correction of the violation. For violations
that are serious or recurring or uncorrected following a previous citation, and
create actual or threatened harm to one or more residents' well-being,
including violations of residents' rights, the department shall make an on-site
revisit as soon as appropriate to ensure correction of the violation.
Verification of correction of all other violations may be made by either a
department on-site revisit or by written or photographic documentation found by
the department to be credible. This subsection does not prevent the department
from enforcing license or contract suspensions or revocations. Nothing in this
subsection shall interfere with or diminish the department's authority and duty
to ensure that the provider adequately cares for residents, including to make
departmental on-site revisits as needed to ensure that the provider protects
residents and to enforce compliance with this chapter.

(f) Substantiated
complaints of neglect, abuse, exploitation, or abandonment of residents, or
suspected criminal violations, shall also be referred by the department to the
appropriate law enforcement agencies, the attorney general, and appropriate
professional disciplining authority.

(6) The department may
provide the substance of the complaint to the licensee or contractor before the
completion of the investigation by the department unless such disclosure would
reveal the identity of a complainant, witness, or resident who chooses to
remain anonymous. Neither the substance of the complaint provided to the
licensee or contractor nor any copy of the complaint or related report
published, released, or made otherwise available shall disclose, or reasonably
lead to the disclosure of, the name, title, or identity of any complainant, or
other person mentioned in the complaint, except that the name of the provider
and the name or names of any officer, employee, or agent of the department
conducting the investigation shall be disclosed after the investigation has
been closed and the complaint has been substantiated. The department may
disclose the identity of the complainant if such disclosure is requested in
writing by the complainant. Nothing in this subsection shall be construed to
interfere with the obligation of the long-term care ombudsman program or
department staff to monitor the department's licensing, contract, and complaint
investigation files for long-term care facilities.

(7) The resident has
the right to be free of interference, coercion, discrimination, and reprisal
from a facility in exercising his or her rights, including the right to voice
grievances about treatment furnished or not furnished. A facility that
provides long-term care services shall not discriminate or retaliate in any
manner against a resident, employee, or any other person on the basis or for
the reason that such resident or any other person made a complaint to the
department, the attorney general, law enforcement agencies, or the long-term
care ombudsman, provided information, or otherwise cooperated with the investigation
of such a complaint. Any attempt to discharge a resident against the
resident's wishes, or any type of retaliatory treatment of a resident by whom
or upon whose behalf a complaint substantiated by the department has been made
to the department, the attorney general, law enforcement agencies, or the
long-term care ombudsman, within one year of the filing of the complaint,
raises a rebuttable presumption that such action was in retaliation for the
filing of the complaint. "Retaliatory treatment" means, but is not
limited to, monitoring a resident's phone, mail, or visits; involuntary
seclusion or isolation; transferring a resident to a different room unless
requested or based upon legitimate management reasons; withholding or
threatening to withhold food or treatment unless authorized by a terminally ill
resident or his or her representative pursuant to law; or persistently delaying
responses to a resident's request for service or assistance. A facility that
provides long-term care services shall not willfully interfere with the
performance of official duties by a long-term care ombudsman. The department
shall sanction and may impose a civil penalty of not more than three thousand
dollars for a violation of this subsection.

Sec. 2. RCW 18.20.185 and 1997 c
392 s 214 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) The department
shall establish and maintain a toll-free telephone number for receiving
complaints regarding a facility that the department licenses.

(2) All facilities that
are licensed under this chapter shall post in a place and manner clearly
visible to residents and visitors the department's toll-free complaint
telephone number and the toll-free number and program description of the
long-term care ombudsman as provided by RCW 43.190.050.

(3) The department
shall investigate complaints if the subject of the complaint is within its
authority unless the department determines that: (a) The complaint is intended
to willfully harass a licensee or employee of the licensee; or (b) there is no
reasonable basis for investigation; or (c) corrective action has been taken as
determined by the ombudsman or the department.

(4) The department
shall refer complaints to appropriate state agencies, law enforcement agencies,
the attorney general, the long-term care ombudsman, or other entities if the
department lacks authority to investigate or if its investigation reveals that
a follow-up referral to one or more of these entities is appropriate.

(5) The department
shall adopt rules that include the following complaint investigation protocols:

(a) Upon receipt of a
complaint, the department shall make a preliminary review of the complaint,
assess the severity of the complaint, and assign an appropriate response time.
Complaints involving imminent danger to the health, safety, or well-being of a
resident must be responded to within two days. When appropriate, the
department shall make an on-site investigation within a reasonable time after
receipt of the complaint or otherwise ensure that complaints are responded to.

(b) The complainant
must be: Promptly contacted by the department, unless anonymous or unavailable
despite several attempts by the department, and informed of the right to
discuss alleged violations with the inspector and to provide other information
the complainant believes will assist the inspector; informed of the
department's course of action; and informed of the right to receive a written
copy of the investigation report.

(c) In conducting the
investigation, the department shall interview the complainant, unless
anonymous, and shall use its best efforts to interview the resident or
residents allegedly harmed by the violations, and, in addition to facility
staff, any available independent sources of relevant information, including if
appropriate the family members of the resident.

(d) Substantiated
complaints involving harm to a resident, if an applicable law or regulation has
been violated, shall be subject to one or more of the actions provided in RCW
18.20.190. Whenever appropriate, the department shall also give consultation
and technical assistance to the facility.

(e) ((In the best
practices of total quality management and continuous quality improvement, after
a department finding of a violation that is serious, recurring, or uncorrected
following a previous citation, the department shall make an on-site revisit of
the facility to ensure correction of the violation.)) After a department
finding of a violation for which a stop placement has been imposed, the
department shall make an on-site revisit of the provider within fifteen working
days from the request for revisit, to ensure correction of the violation. For
violations that are serious or recurring or uncorrected following a previous citation,
and create actual or threatened harm to one or more residents' well-being,
including violations of residents' rights, the department shall make an on-site
revisit as soon as appropriate to ensure correction of the violation.
Verification of correction of all other violations may be made by either a
department on-site revisit or by written or photographic documentation found by
the department to be credible. This subsection does not prevent the
department from enforcing license suspensions or revocations. Nothing in
this subsection shall interfere with or diminish the department's authority and
duty to ensure that the provider adequately cares for residents, including to
make departmental on-site revisits as needed to ensure that the provider protects
residents, and to enforce compliance with this chapter.

(f) Substantiated
complaints of neglect, abuse, exploitation, or abandonment of residents, or
suspected criminal violations, shall also be referred by the department to the
appropriate law enforcement agencies, the attorney general, and appropriate
professional disciplining authority.

(6) The department may
provide the substance of the complaint to the licensee before the completion of
the investigation by the department unless such disclosure would reveal the
identity of a complainant, witness, or resident who chooses to remain
anonymous. Neither the substance of the complaint provided to the licensee or
contractor nor any copy of the complaint or related report published, released,
or made otherwise available shall disclose, or reasonably lead to the
disclosure of, the name, title, or identity of any complainant, or other person
mentioned in the complaint, except that the name of the provider and the name
or names of any officer, employee, or agent of the department conducting the
investigation shall be disclosed after the investigation has been closed and
the complaint has been substantiated. The department may disclose the identity
of the complainant if such disclosure is requested in writing by the
complainant. Nothing in this subsection shall be construed to interfere with
the obligation of the long-term care ombudsman program to monitor the
department's licensing, contract, and complaint investigation files for
long-term care facilities.

(7) The resident has
the right to be free of interference, coercion, discrimination, and reprisal
from a facility in exercising his or her rights, including the right to voice
grievances about treatment furnished or not furnished. A facility licensed under
this chapter shall not discriminate or retaliate in any manner against a
resident, employee, or any other person on the basis or for the reason that
such resident or any other person made a complaint to the department, the
attorney general, law enforcement agencies, or the long-term care ombudsman,
provided information, or otherwise cooperated with the investigation of such a
complaint. Any attempt to discharge a resident against the resident's wishes,
or any type of retaliatory treatment of a resident by whom or upon whose behalf
a complaint substantiated by the department has been made to the department,
the attorney general, law enforcement agencies, or the long-term care
ombudsman, within one year of the filing of the complaint, raises a rebuttable
presumption that such action was in retaliation for the filing of the
complaint. "Retaliatory treatment" means, but is not limited to,
monitoring a resident's phone, mail, or visits; involuntary seclusion or
isolation; transferring a resident to a different room unless requested or
based upon legitimate management reasons; withholding or threatening to
withhold food or treatment unless authorized by a terminally ill resident or
his or her representative pursuant to law; or persistently delaying responses to
a resident's request for service or assistance. A facility licensed under this
chapter shall not willfully interfere with the performance of official duties
by a long-term care ombudsman. The department shall sanction and may impose a
civil penalty of not more than three thousand dollars for a violation of this
subsection.

Sec. 3. RCW 74.39A.080 and 1996
c 193 s 1 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) The department is
authorized to take one or more of the actions listed in subsection (2) of this
section in any case in which the department finds that a provider of assisted
living services, adult residential care services, or enhanced adult residential
care services has:

(a) Failed or refused
to comply with the requirements of this chapter or the rules adopted under this
chapter;

(b) Operated without a
license or under a revoked license;

(c) Knowingly, or with
reason to know, made a false statement of material fact on his or her
application for license or any data attached thereto, or in any matter under
investigation by the department; or

(d) Willfully prevented
or interfered with any inspection or investigation by the department.

(2) When authorized by
subsection (1) of this section, the department may take one or more of the
following actions:

(a) Refuse to issue a
contract;

(b) Impose reasonable
conditions on a contract, such as correction within a specified time, training,
and limits on the type of clients the provider may admit or serve;

(c) Impose civil
penalties of not more than one hundred dollars per day per violation;

(d) Suspend, revoke, or
refuse to renew a contract; or

(e) Suspend admissions
to the facility by imposing stop placement on contracted services.

(3) When the department
orders stop placement, the facility shall not admit any person admitted by
contract until the stop placement order is terminated. The department may
approve readmission of a resident to the facility from a hospital or nursing
home during the stop placement. The department shall terminate the stop
placement when: (a) The violations necessitating the stop placement have been
corrected; and (b) the provider exhibits the capacity to maintain ((adequate
care and service)) correction of the violations previously found
deficient. However, if upon the revisit the department finds new violations
that the department reasonably believes will result in a new stop placement,
the previous stop placement shall remain in effect until the new stop placement
is imposed.

After a department
finding of a violation for which a stop placement has been imposed, the
department shall make an on-site revisit of the provider within fifteen working
days from the request for revisit, to ensure correction of the violation. For
violations that are serious or recurring or uncorrected following a previous
citation, and create actual or threatened harm to one or more residents'
well-being, including violations of residents' rights, the department shall
make an on-site revisit as soon as appropriate to ensure correction of the
violation. Verification of correction of all other violations may be made by
either a department on-site revisit or by written or photographic documentation
found by the department to be credible. This subsection does not prevent the department
from enforcing license suspensions or revocations. Nothing in this subsection
shall interfere with or diminish the department's authority and duty to ensure
that the provider adequately cares for residents, including to make
departmental on-site revisits as needed to ensure that the provider protects
residents, and to enforce compliance with this chapter.

(4) Chapter 34.05 RCW
applies to department actions under this section, except that orders of the
department imposing contracts suspension, stop placement, or conditions for
continuation of a contract are effective immediately upon notice and shall
continue pending any hearing.

Sec. 4. RCW 18.20.190 and 2000 c
47 s 7 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) The department of
social and health services is authorized to take one or more of the actions
listed in subsection (2) of this section in any case in which the department
finds that a boarding home provider has:

(a) Failed or refused
to comply with the requirements of this chapter or the rules adopted under this
chapter;

(b) Operated a boarding
home without a license or under a revoked license;

(c) Knowingly, or with
reason to know, made a false statement of material fact on his or her
application for license or any data attached thereto, or in any matter under
investigation by the department; or

(d) Willfully prevented
or interfered with any inspection or investigation by the department.

(2) When authorized by
subsection (1) of this section, the department may take one or more of the
following actions:

(a) Refuse to issue a
license;

(b) Impose reasonable
conditions on a license, such as correction within a specified time, training,
and limits on the type of clients the provider may admit or serve;

(c) Impose civil
penalties of not more than one hundred dollars per day per violation;

(d) Suspend, revoke, or
refuse to renew a license; or

(e) Suspend admissions
to the boarding home by imposing stop placement.

(3) When the department
orders stop placement, the facility shall not admit any new resident until the
stop placement order is terminated. The department may approve readmission of
a resident to the facility from a hospital or nursing home during the stop
placement. The department shall terminate the stop placement when: (a) The
violations necessitating the stop placement have been corrected; and (b) the
provider exhibits the capacity to maintain ((adequate care and service))
correction of the violations previously found deficient. However, if upon
the revisit the department finds new violations that the department reasonably
believes will result in a new stop placement, the previous stop placement shall
remain in effect until the new stop placement is imposed.

(4) After a
department finding of a violation for which a stop placement has been imposed,
the department shall make an on-site revisit of the provider within fifteen
working days from the request for revisit, to ensure correction of the
violation. For violations that are serious or recurring or uncorrected
following a previous citation, and create actual or threatened harm to one or
more residents' well-being, including violations of residents' rights, the
department shall make an on-site revisit as soon as appropriate to ensure correction
of the violation. Verification of correction of all other violations may be
made by either a department on-site revisit or by written or photographic
documentation found by the department to be credible. This subsection does not
prevent the department from enforcing license suspensions or revocations.
Nothing in this subsection shall interfere with or diminish the department's
authority and duty to ensure that the provider adequately cares for residents,
including to make departmental on-site revisits as needed to ensure that the
provider protects residents, and to enforce compliance with this chapter.

(5) RCW
43.20A.205 governs notice of a license denial, revocation, suspension, or
modification. Chapter 34.05 RCW applies to department actions under this
section, except that orders of the department imposing license suspension, stop
placement, or conditions for continuation of a license are effective
immediately upon notice and shall continue pending any hearing.

Sec. 5. RCW 70.128.160 and 1995
1st sp.s. c 18 s 28 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) The department is
authorized to take one or more of the actions listed in subsection (2) of this
section in any case in which the department finds that an adult family home
provider has:

(a) Failed or refused
to comply with the requirements of this chapter or the rules adopted under this
chapter;

(b) Operated an adult
family home without a license or under a revoked license;

(c) Knowingly or with
reason to know made a false statement of material fact on his or her
application for license or any data attached thereto, or in any matter under
investigation by the department; or

(d) Willfully prevented
or interfered with any inspection or investigation by the department.

(2) When authorized by
subsection (1) of this section, the department may take one or more of the
following actions:

(a) Refuse to issue a
license;

(b) Impose reasonable
conditions on a license, such as correction within a specified time, training,
and limits on the type of clients the provider may admit or serve;

(c) Impose civil
penalties of not more than one hundred dollars per day per violation;

(d) Suspend, revoke, or
refuse to renew a license; or

(e) Suspend admissions
to the adult family home by imposing stop placement.

(3) When the department
orders stop placement, the facility shall not admit any person until the stop
placement order is terminated. The department may approve readmission of a resident
to the facility from a hospital or nursing home during the stop placement. The
department shall terminate the stop placement when: (a) The violations
necessitating the stop placement have been corrected; and (b) the provider
exhibits the capacity to maintain ((adequate care and service)) correction
of the violations previously found deficient. However, if upon the revisit the
department finds new violations that the department reasonably believes will
result in a new stop placement, the previous stop placement shall remain in
effect until the new stop placement is imposed.

(4) After a
department finding of a violation for which a stop placement has been imposed,
the department shall make an on-site revisit of the provider within fifteen
working days from the request for revisit, to ensure correction of the
violation. For violations that are serious or recurring or uncorrected
following a previous citation, and create actual or threatened harm to one or
more residents' well-being, including violations of residents' rights, the
department shall make an on-site revisit as soon as appropriate to ensure
correction of the violation. Verification of correction of all other
violations may be made by either a department on-site revisit or by written or photographic
documentation found by the department to be credible. This subsection does not
prevent the department from enforcing license suspensions or revocations.
Nothing in this subsection shall interfere with or diminish the department's
authority and duty to ensure that the provider adequately cares for residents,
including to make departmental on-site revisits as needed to ensure that the
provider protects residents, and to enforce compliance with this chapter.

(5) Chapter
34.05 RCW applies to department actions under this section, except that orders
of the department imposing license suspension, stop placement, or conditions
for continuation of a license are effective immediately upon notice and shall
continue in effect pending any hearing.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
6. A new section is added
to chapter 70.128 RCW to read as follows:

(1) When the department
has summarily suspended a license, the licensee may, subject to the
department's approval, elect to participate in a temporary management program.
All provisions of this section shall apply.

The purposes of a
temporary management program are as follows:

(a) To mitigate
dislocation and transfer trauma of residents while the department and licensee
may pursue dispute resolution or appeal of a summary suspension of license;

(b) To facilitate the
continuity of safe and appropriate resident care and services;

(c) To preserve a
residential option that meets a specialized service need and/or is in a
geographical area that has a lack of available providers; and

(d) To provide
residents with the opportunity for orderly discharge.

(2) Licensee
participation in the temporary management program is voluntary. The department
shall have the discretion to approve any temporary manager and the temporary
management arrangements. The temporary management shall assume the total
responsibility for the daily operations of the home.

(3) The temporary
management shall contract with the licensee as an independent contractor and is
responsible for ensuring that all minimum licensing requirements are met. The
temporary management shall protect the health, safety, and well-being of the
residents for the duration of the temporary management and shall perform all
acts reasonably necessary to ensure that residents' needs are met. The
licensee is responsible for all costs related to administering the temporary
management program and contracting with the temporary management. The
temporary management agreement shall at a minimum address the following:

(a) Provision of
liability insurance to protect residents and their property;

(b) Preservation of
resident trust funds;

(c) The timely payment
of past due or current accounts, operating expenses, including but not limited
to staff compensation, and all debt that comes due during the period of the
temporary management;

(d) The
responsibilities for addressing all other financial obligations that would
interfere with the ability of the temporary manager to provide adequate care
and services to residents; and

(e) The authority of
the temporary manager to manage the home, including the hiring, managing, and
firing of employees for good cause, and to provide adequate care and services
to residents.

(4) The licensee and
department shall provide written notification immediately to all residents,
legal representatives, interested family members, and the state long-term care
ombudsman program, of the temporary management and the reasons for it. This
notification shall include notice that residents may move from the home without
notifying the licensee in advance, and without incurring any charges, fees, or
costs otherwise available for insufficient advance notice, during the temporary
management period.

(5) The temporary
management period under this section concludes twenty-eight days after issuance
of the formal notification of enforcement action or conclusion of
administrative proceedings, whichever date is later. Nothing in this section
precludes the department from revoking its approval of the temporary management
and/or exercising its licensing enforcement authority under this chapter. The
department's decision whether to approve or to revoke a temporary management
arrangement is not subject to the administrative procedure act, chapter 34.05
RCW.

(6) The department is
authorized to adopt rules implementing this section. In implementing this
section, the department shall consult with consumers, advocates, the adult
family home advisory committee established under chapter 18.48 RCW, and
organizations representing adult family homes. The department may recruit and
approve qualified, licensed providers interested in serving as temporary
managers.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
7. A new section is added
to chapter 18.20 RCW to read as follows:

(1) The licensee or its
designee has the right to an informal dispute resolution process to dispute any
violation found or enforcement remedy imposed by the department during a
licensing inspection or complaint investigation. The purpose of the informal dispute
resolution process is to provide an opportunity for an exchange of information
that may lead to the modification, deletion, or removal of a violation, or
parts of a violation, or enforcement remedy imposed by the department.

(2) The informal dispute
resolution process provided by the department shall include, but is not
necessarily limited to, an opportunity for review by a department employee who
did not participate in, or oversee, the determination of the violation or
enforcement remedy under dispute. The department shall develop, or further
develop, an informal dispute resolution process consistent with this section.

(3) A request for an
informal dispute resolution shall be made to the department within ten working
days from the receipt of a written finding of a violation or enforcement
remedy. The request shall identify the violation or violations and enforcement
remedy or remedies being disputed. The department shall convene a meeting,
when possible, within ten working days of receipt of the request for informal
dispute resolution, unless by mutual agreement a later date is agreed upon.

(4) If the department
determines that a violation or enforcement remedy should not be cited or
imposed, the department shall delete the violation or immediately rescind or
modify the enforcement remedy. Upon request, the department shall issue a
clean copy of the revised report, statement of deficiencies, or notice of
enforcement action.

(5) The request for
informal dispute resolution does not delay the effective date of any
enforcement remedy imposed by the department, except that civil monetary fines
are not payable until the exhaustion of any formal hearing and appeal rights
provided under this chapter. The licensee shall submit to the department,
within the time period prescribed by the department, a plan of correction to
address any undisputed violations, and including any violations that still
remain following the informal dispute resolution.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
8. A new section is added
to chapter 70.128 RCW to read as follows:

(1) The licensee or its
designee has the right to an informal dispute resolution process to dispute any
violation found or enforcement remedy imposed by the department during a
licensing inspection or complaint investigation. The purpose of the informal
dispute resolution process is to provide an opportunity for an exchange of
information that may lead to the modification, deletion, or removal of a
violation, or parts of a violation, or enforcement remedy imposed by the
department.

(2) The informal
dispute resolution process provided by the department shall include, but is not
necessarily limited to, an opportunity for review by a department employee who
did not participate in, or oversee, the determination of the violation or
enforcement remedy under dispute. The department shall develop, or further
develop, an informal dispute resolution process consistent with this section.

(3) A request for an
informal dispute resolution shall be made to the department within ten working
days from the receipt of a written finding of a violation or enforcement
remedy. The request shall identify the violation or violations and enforcement
remedy or remedies being disputed. The department shall convene a meeting, when
possible, within ten working days of receipt of the request for informal
dispute resolution, unless by mutual agreement a later date is agreed upon.

(4) If the department
determines that a violation or enforcement remedy should not be cited or
imposed, the department shall delete the violation or immediately rescind or
modify the enforcement remedy. Upon request, the department shall issue a
clean copy of the revised report, statement of deficiencies, or notice of
enforcement action.

(5) The request for
informal dispute resolution does not delay the effective date of any
enforcement remedy imposed by the department, except that civil monetary fines
are not payable until the exhaustion of any formal hearing and appeal rights
provided under this chapter. The licensee shall submit to the department,
within the time period prescribed by the department, a plan of correction to
address any undisputed violations, and including any violations that still
remain following the informal dispute resolution.

Sec. 9. RCW 70.128.060 and 1995
c 260 s 4 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) An application for
license shall be made to the department upon forms provided by it and shall
contain such information as the department reasonably requires.

(2) The department
shall issue a license to an adult family home if the department finds that the
applicant and the home are in compliance with this chapter and the rules
adopted under this chapter, unless (a) the applicant has prior violations of
this chapter relating to the adult family home subject to the application or
any other adult family home, or of any other law regulating residential care
facilities within the past five years that resulted in revocation or nonrenewal
of a license; or (b) the applicant has a history of significant noncompliance
with federal, state, or local laws, rules, or regulations relating to the
provision of care or services to vulnerable adults or to children.

(3) The license fee
shall be submitted with the application.

(4) The department
shall serve upon the applicant a copy of the decision granting or denying an
application for a license. An applicant shall have the right to contest denial
of his or her application for a license as provided in chapter 34.05 RCW by
requesting a hearing in writing within twenty-eight days after receipt of the
notice of denial.

(5) The department
shall not issue a license to a provider if the department finds that the
provider or any partner, officer, director, managerial employee, or owner of
five percent or more if the provider has a history of significant noncompliance
with federal or state regulations, rules, or laws in providing care or services
to vulnerable adults or to children.

(6) The department
shall license an adult family home for the maximum level of care that the adult
family home may provide. The department shall define, in rule, license levels
based upon the education, training, and caregiving experience of the licensed
provider or staff.

(7) The department
shall establish, by rule, standards used to license nonresident providers and
multiple facility operators.

(8) The department
shall establish, by rule, for multiple facility operators educational standards
substantially equivalent to recognized national certification standards for
residential care administrators.

(9) The license fee
shall be set at fifty dollars per year for each home. A fifty dollar
processing fee shall also be charged each home when the home is initially
licensed.

(10) A provider who
receives notification of the department's initiation of a denial, suspension,
nonrenewal, or revocation of an adult family home license may, in lieu of
appealing the department's action, surrender or relinquish the license. The
department shall not issue a new license to or contract with the provider, for
the purposes of providing care to vulnerable adults or children, for a period
of twenty years following the surrendering or relinquishment of the former
license. The licensing record shall indicate that the provider relinquished or
surrendered the license, without admitting the violations, after receiving
notice of the department's initiation of a denial, suspension, nonrenewal, or
revocation of a license.

Sec. 10. RCW 18.20.050 and 2000 c
47 s 3 are each amended to read as follows:

Upon receipt of an
application for license, if the applicant and the boarding home facilities meet
the requirements established under this chapter, the department shall issue a
license. If there is a failure to comply with the provisions of this chapter
or the standards and rules adopted pursuant thereto, the department may in its
discretion issue to an applicant for a license, or for the renewal of a
license, a provisional license which will permit the operation of the boarding
home for a period to be determined by the department, but not to exceed twelve
months, which provisional license shall not be subject to renewal. At the time
of the application for or renewal of a license or provisional license the
licensee shall pay a license fee as established by the department under RCW
43.20B.110. All licenses issued under the provisions of this chapter shall
expire on a date to be set by the department, but no license issued pursuant to
this chapter shall exceed twelve months in duration. However, when the annual
license renewal date of a previously licensed boarding home is set by the
department on a date less than twelve months prior to the expiration date of a
license in effect at the time of reissuance, the license fee shall be prorated
on a monthly basis and a credit be allowed at the first renewal of a license
for any period of one month or more covered by the previous license. All
applications for renewal of a license shall be made not later than thirty days
prior to the date of expiration of the license. Each license shall be issued
only for the premises and persons named in the application, and no license
shall be transferable or assignable. Licenses shall be posted in a conspicuous
place on the licensed premises.

A licensee who
receives notification of the department's initiation of a denial, suspension,
nonrenewal, or revocation of a boarding home license may, in lieu of appealing
the department's action, surrender or relinquish the license. The department
shall not issue a new license to or contract with the licensee, for the
purposes of providing care to vulnerable adults or children, for a period of
twenty years following the surrendering or relinquishment of the former license.
The licensing record shall indicate that the licensee relinquished or
surrendered the license, without admitting the violations, after receiving
notice of the department's initiation of a denial, suspension, nonrenewal, or
revocation of a license.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
11. The joint house of
representatives and senate task force on resident protection standards in adult
family homes and boarding homes is established. The task force shall consist
of four members. The co-speakers of the house of representatives shall select
two members from the house of representatives, one from each political caucus,
and the president of the senate shall select two members from the senate, one
from each political caucus. The task force shall have the ability to create
advisory committees and appoint individuals from a variety of disciplines and
perspectives, including but not limited to licensed providers, industry
representatives, the department of social and health services, the long-term care
ombudsman, consumer and advocacy representatives for the elderly and disabled,
persons with developmental disabilities, and persons with mental illness. The
joint task force shall elect a chair and a vice-chair.

The task force shall
examine the current enforcement and resident protection standards, due process,
departmental due process and other relevant operations, and complaint
investigation processes that apply to and operate in the adult family home and
boarding home licensing and quality assurance programs. The task force shall
also identify other due process and protection issues including dispute
resolution, mediation, emergency temporary management, and resident
displacement. The task force shall submit a report to the appropriate committee
chairs of the house of representatives and the senate by December 12, 2001.
The report must include information related to the current enforcement and
resident protection standards, due process, department operational procedures,
and recommendations for changes in those standards, systems, and procedures.
The report must include a description of the impact of the recommended changes
on resident safety and quality of life, providers, consumers, the department,
and the state budget.

Primary staff assistance
to the task force shall be provided by the health care committee of the house
of representatives, office of program research, and the senate health and
long-term care committee, senate committee services.

This
section expires December 31, 2001.

---
END ---