BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF
WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1. RCW 13.40.020 and 1997 c
338 s 10 are each amended to read as follows:

For the purposes of
this chapter:

(1)
"Community-based rehabilitation" means one or more of the following:
Employment; attendance of information classes; literacy classes; counseling,
outpatient substance abuse treatment programs, outpatient mental health
programs, anger management classes, education or outpatient treatment programs
to prevent animal cruelty, or other services; or attendance at school or other
educational programs appropriate for the juvenile as determined by the school
district. Placement in community-based rehabilitation programs is subject to
available funds;

(2) Community-based
sanctions may include one or more of the following:

(a) A fine, not to
exceed five hundred dollars;

(b) Community service
not to exceed one hundred fifty hours of service;

(3) "Community
service" means compulsory service, without compensation, performed for the
benefit of the community by the offender as punishment for committing an
offense. Community service may be performed through public or private
organizations or through work crews;

(4) "Community
supervision" means an order of disposition by the court of an adjudicated
youth not committed to the department or an order granting a deferred
disposition. A community supervision order for a single offense may be for a
period of up to two years for a sex offense as defined by RCW 9.94A.030 and up
to one year for other offenses. As a mandatory condition of any term of
community supervision, the court shall order the juvenile to refrain from
committing new offenses. As a mandatory condition of community supervision,
the court shall order the juvenile to comply with the mandatory school
attendance provisions of chapter 28A.225 RCW and to inform the school of the
existence of this requirement. Community supervision is an individualized
program comprised of one or more of the following:

(a) Community-based
sanctions;

(b) Community-based
rehabilitation;

(c) Monitoring and
reporting requirements;

(d) Posting of a
probation bond;

(5)
"Confinement" means physical custody by the department of social and
health services in a facility operated by or pursuant to a contract with the
state, or physical custody in a detention facility operated by or pursuant to a
contract with any county. The county may operate or contract with vendors to
operate county detention facilities. The department may operate or contract to
operate detention facilities for juveniles committed to the department.
Pretrial confinement or confinement of less than thirty-one days imposed as
part of a disposition or modification order may be served consecutively or
intermittently, in the discretion of the court;

(6) "Court,"
when used without further qualification, means the juvenile court judge(s) or
commissioner(s);

(7) "Criminal
history" includes all criminal complaints against the respondent for
which, prior to the commission of a current offense:

(a) The allegations
were found correct by a court. If a respondent is convicted of two or more
charges arising out of the same course of conduct, only the highest charge from
among these shall count as an offense for the purposes of this chapter; or

(b) The criminal
complaint was diverted by a prosecutor pursuant to the provisions of this
chapter on agreement of the respondent and after an advisement to the
respondent that the criminal complaint would be considered as part of the
respondent's criminal history. A successfully completed deferred adjudication
that was entered before July 1, 1998, or a deferred disposition shall not be
considered part of the respondent's criminal history;

(8)
"Department" means the department of social and health services;

(9) "Detention
facility" means a county facility, paid for by the county, for the
physical confinement of a juvenile alleged to have committed an offense or an
adjudicated offender subject to a disposition or modification order.
"Detention facility" includes county group homes, inpatient substance
abuse programs, juvenile basic training camps, and electronic monitoring;

(10) "Diversion
unit" means any probation counselor who enters into a diversion agreement
with an alleged youthful offender, or any other person, community
accountability board, youth court under the supervision of the juvenile
court, or other entity except a law enforcement official or entity, with
whom the juvenile court administrator has contracted to arrange and supervise
such agreements pursuant to RCW 13.40.080, or any person, community
accountability board, or other entity specially funded by the legislature to
arrange and supervise diversion agreements in accordance with the requirements
of this chapter. For purposes of this subsection, "community
accountability board" means a board comprised of members of the local
community in which the juvenile offender resides. The superior court shall
appoint the members. The boards shall consist of at least three and not more
than seven members. If possible, the board should include a variety of
representatives from the community, such as a law enforcement officer, teacher
or school administrator, high school student, parent, and business owner, and
should represent the cultural diversity of the local community;

(11) "Foster
care" means temporary physical care in a foster family home or group care
facility as defined in RCW 74.15.020 and licensed by the department, or other
legally authorized care;

(12)
"Institution" means a juvenile facility established pursuant to
chapters 72.05 and 72.16 through 72.20 RCW;

(13) "Intensive
supervision program" means a parole program that requires intensive
supervision and monitoring, offers an array of individualized treatment and
transitional services, and emphasizes community involvement and support in
order to reduce the likelihood a juvenile offender will commit further
offenses;

(14)
"Juvenile," "youth," and "child" mean any
individual who is under the chronological age of eighteen years and who has not
been previously transferred to adult court pursuant to RCW 13.40.110 or who is
otherwise under adult court jurisdiction;

(15) "Juvenile
offender" means any juvenile who has been found by the juvenile court to
have committed an offense, including a person eighteen years of age or older
over whom jurisdiction has been extended under RCW 13.40.300;

(16) "Local
sanctions" means one or more of the following: (a) 0‑30 days of
confinement; (b) 0‑12 months of community supervision; (c) 0‑150
hours of community service; or (d) $0‑$500 fine;

(17) "Manifest
injustice" means a disposition that would either impose an excessive penalty
on the juvenile or would impose a serious, and clear danger to society in light
of the purposes of this chapter;

(18) "Monitoring
and reporting requirements" means one or more of the following: Curfews;
requirements to remain at home, school, work, or court-ordered treatment
programs during specified hours; restrictions from leaving or entering
specified geographical areas; requirements to report to the probation officer
as directed and to remain under the probation officer's supervision; and other conditions
or limitations as the court may require which may not include confinement;

(19)
"Offense" means an act designated a violation or a crime if committed
by an adult under the law of this state, under any ordinance of any city or
county of this state, under any federal law, or under the law of another state
if the act occurred in that state;

(20) "Probation
bond" means a bond, posted with sufficient security by a surety justified
and approved by the court, to secure the offender's appearance at required
court proceedings and compliance with court-ordered community supervision or
conditions of release ordered pursuant to RCW 13.40.040 or 13.40.050. It also
means a deposit of cash or posting of other collateral in lieu of a bond if
approved by the court;

(21)
"Respondent" means a juvenile who is alleged or proven to have
committed an offense;

(22)
"Restitution" means financial reimbursement by the offender to the
victim, and shall be limited to easily ascertainable damages for injury to or
loss of property, actual expenses incurred for medical treatment for physical
injury to persons, lost wages resulting from physical injury, and costs of the
victim's counseling reasonably related to the offense if the offense is a sex
offense. Restitution shall not include reimbursement for damages for mental
anguish, pain and suffering, or other intangible losses. Nothing in this
chapter shall limit or replace civil remedies or defenses available to the
victim or offender;

(23)
"Secretary" means the secretary of the department of social and
health services. "Assistant secretary" means the assistant secretary
for juvenile rehabilitation for the department;

(24)
"Services" means services which provide alternatives to incarceration
for those juveniles who have pleaded or been adjudicated guilty of an offense
or have signed a diversion agreement pursuant to this chapter;

(25) "Sex
offense" means an offense defined as a sex offense in RCW 9.94A.030;

(26) "Sexual
motivation" means that one of the purposes for which the respondent
committed the offense was for the purpose of his or her sexual gratification;

(27) "Surety"
means an entity licensed under state insurance laws or by the state department
of licensing, to write corporate, property, or probation bonds within the
state, and justified and approved by the superior court of the county having
jurisdiction of the case;

(28)
"Violation" means an act or omission, which if committed by an adult,
must be proven beyond a reasonable doubt, and is punishable by sanctions which
do not include incarceration;

(29) "Violent
offense" means a violent offense as defined in RCW 9.94A.030.

(30) "Youth
court" means a program under the supervision of the juvenile court.

Sec. 2. RCW 13.40.080 and 1999 c
91 s 1 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) A diversion
agreement shall be a contract between a juvenile accused of an offense and a
diversionary unit whereby the juvenile agrees to fulfill certain conditions in
lieu of prosecution. Such agreements may be entered into only after the
prosecutor, or probation counselor pursuant to this chapter, has determined
that probable cause exists to believe that a crime has been committed and that
the juvenile committed it. Such agreements shall be entered into as
expeditiously as possible.

(2) A diversion
agreement shall be limited to one or more of the following:

(a) Community service
not to exceed one hundred fifty hours, not to be performed during school hours
if the juvenile is attending school;

(b) Restitution limited
to the amount of actual loss incurred by the victim;

(c) Attendance at up to
ten hours of counseling and/or up to twenty hours of educational or
informational sessions at a community agency. The educational or informational
sessions may include sessions relating to respect for self, others, and
authority; victim awareness; accountability; self-worth; responsibility; work
ethics; good citizenship; literacy; and life skills. For purposes of this
section, "community agency" may also mean a community-based nonprofit
organization, if approved by the diversion unit. The state shall not be liable
for costs resulting from the diversionary unit exercising the option to permit
diversion agreements to mandate attendance at up to ten hours of counseling
and/or up to twenty hours of educational or informational sessions;

(d) A fine, not to
exceed one hundred dollars. In determining the amount of the fine, the
diversion unit shall consider only the juvenile's financial resources and
whether the juvenile has the means to pay the fine. The diversion unit shall
not consider the financial resources of the juvenile's parents, guardian, or
custodian in determining the fine to be imposed;

(e) Requirements to
remain during specified hours at home, school, or work, and restrictions on
leaving or entering specified geographical areas; and

(f) Upon request of the
victim or witness, requirements to refrain from any contact with victims or
witnesses of offenses committed by the juvenile.

(3) Notwithstanding
the provisions of subsection (2) of this section, youth courts are not limited
to the conditions imposed by subsection (2) of this section in imposing
sanctions on juveniles pursuant to section 8 of this act.

(4) In assessing
periods of community service to be performed and restitution to be paid by a
juvenile who has entered into a diversion agreement, the court officer to whom
this task is assigned shall consult with the juvenile's custodial parent or
parents or guardian and victims who have contacted the diversionary unit and,
to the extent possible, involve members of the community. Such members of the
community shall meet with the juvenile and advise the court officer as to the
terms of the diversion agreement and shall supervise the juvenile in carrying
out its terms.

(((4))) (5)(a)
A diversion agreement may not exceed a period of six months and may include a
period extending beyond the eighteenth birthday of the divertee.

(b) If additional time
is necessary for the juvenile to complete restitution to the victim, the time
period limitations of this subsection may be extended by an additional six
months.

(c) If the juvenile has
not paid the full amount of restitution by the end of the additional six-month
period, then the juvenile shall be referred to the juvenile court for entry of
an order establishing the amount of restitution still owed to the victim. In
this order, the court shall also determine the terms and conditions of the
restitution, including a payment plan extending up to ten years if the court
determines that the juvenile does not have the means to make full restitution
over a shorter period. For the purposes of this subsection (((4))) (5)(c),
the juvenile shall remain under the court's jurisdiction for a maximum term of
ten years after the juvenile's eighteenth birthday. Prior to the expiration of
the initial ten-year period, the juvenile court may extend the judgment for
restitution an additional ten years. The court may not require the juvenile to
pay full or partial restitution if the juvenile reasonably satisfies the court
that he or she does not have the means to make full or partial restitution and
could not reasonably acquire the means to pay the restitution over a ten-year
period. The county clerk shall make disbursements to victims named in the
order. The restitution to victims named in the order shall be paid prior to
any payment for other penalties or monetary assessments. A juvenile under
obligation to pay restitution may petition the court for modification of the
restitution order.

(((5))) (6)
The juvenile shall retain the right to be referred to the court at any time
prior to the signing of the diversion agreement.

(((6))) (7)
Divertees and potential divertees shall be afforded due process in all contacts
with a diversionary unit regardless of whether the juveniles are accepted for
diversion or whether the diversion program is successfully completed. Such due
process shall include, but not be limited to, the following:

(a) A written diversion
agreement shall be executed stating all conditions in clearly understandable
language;

(b) Violation of the
terms of the agreement shall be the only grounds for termination;

(c) No divertee may be
terminated from a diversion program without being given a court hearing, which
hearing shall be preceded by:

(i) Written notice of
alleged violations of the conditions of the diversion program; and

(ii) Disclosure of all
evidence to be offered against the divertee;

(d) The hearing shall
be conducted by the juvenile court and shall include:

(i) Opportunity to be
heard in person and to present evidence;

(ii) The right to
confront and cross-examine all adverse witnesses;

(iii) A written
statement by the court as to the evidence relied on and the reasons for
termination, should that be the decision; and

(iv) Demonstration by
evidence that the divertee has substantially violated the terms of his or her
diversion agreement.

(e) The prosecutor may
file an information on the offense for which the divertee was diverted:

(i) In juvenile court
if the divertee is under eighteen years of age; or

(ii) In superior court
or the appropriate court of limited jurisdiction if the divertee is eighteen
years of age or older.

(((7))) (8)
The diversion unit shall, subject to available funds, be responsible for
providing interpreters when juveniles need interpreters to effectively
communicate during diversion unit hearings or negotiations.

(((8))) (9)
The diversion unit shall be responsible for advising a divertee of his or her
rights as provided in this chapter.

(((9))) (10)
The diversion unit may refer a juvenile to community-based counseling or
treatment programs.

(((10))) (11)
The right to counsel shall inure prior to the initial interview for purposes of
advising the juvenile as to whether he or she desires to participate in the
diversion process or to appear in the juvenile court. The juvenile may be
represented by counsel at any critical stage of the diversion process,
including intake interviews and termination hearings. The juvenile shall be
fully advised at the intake of his or her right to an attorney and of the
relevant services an attorney can provide. For the purpose of this section,
intake interviews mean all interviews regarding the diversion agreement
process.

The juvenile shall be
advised that a diversion agreement shall constitute a part of the juvenile's
criminal history as defined by RCW 13.40.020(7). A signed acknowledgment of
such advisement shall be obtained from the juvenile, and the document shall be
maintained by the diversionary unit together with the diversion agreement, and
a copy of both documents shall be delivered to the prosecutor if requested by
the prosecutor. The supreme court shall promulgate rules setting forth the
content of such advisement in simple language.

(((11))) (12)
When a juvenile enters into a diversion agreement, the juvenile court may
receive only the following information for dispositional purposes:

(a) The fact that a
charge or charges were made;

(b) The fact that a
diversion agreement was entered into;

(c) The juvenile's
obligations under such agreement;

(d) Whether the alleged
offender performed his or her obligations under such agreement; and

(e) The facts of the
alleged offense.

(((12))) (13)
A diversionary unit may refuse to enter into a diversion agreement with a
juvenile. When a diversionary unit refuses to enter a diversion agreement with
a juvenile, it shall immediately refer such juvenile to the court for action
and shall forward to the court the criminal complaint and a detailed statement
of its reasons for refusing to enter into a diversion agreement. The
diversionary unit shall also immediately refer the case to the prosecuting
attorney for action if such juvenile violates the terms of the diversion
agreement.

(((13))) (14)
A diversionary unit may, in instances where it determines that the act or
omission of an act for which a juvenile has been referred to it involved no victim,
or where it determines that the juvenile referred to it has no prior criminal
history and is alleged to have committed an illegal act involving no threat of
or instance of actual physical harm and involving not more than fifty dollars
in property loss or damage and that there is no loss outstanding to the person
or firm suffering such damage or loss, counsel and release or release such a
juvenile without entering into a diversion agreement. A diversion unit's
authority to counsel and release a juvenile under this subsection shall include
the authority to refer the juvenile to community-based counseling or treatment
programs. Any juvenile released under this subsection shall be advised that
the act or omission of any act for which he or she had been referred shall
constitute a part of the juvenile's criminal history as defined by RCW
13.40.020(7). A signed acknowledgment of such advisement shall be obtained
from the juvenile, and the document shall be maintained by the unit, and a copy
of the document shall be delivered to the prosecutor if requested by the
prosecutor. The supreme court shall promulgate rules setting forth the content
of such advisement in simple language. A juvenile determined to be eligible by
a diversionary unit for release as provided in this subsection shall retain the
same right to counsel and right to have his or her case referred to the court
for formal action as any other juvenile referred to the unit.

(((14))) (15)
A diversion unit may supervise the fulfillment of a diversion agreement entered
into before the juvenile's eighteenth birthday and which includes a period
extending beyond the divertee's eighteenth birthday.

(((15))) (16)
If a fine required by a diversion agreement cannot reasonably be paid due to a
change of circumstance, the diversion agreement may be modified at the request
of the divertee and with the concurrence of the diversion unit to convert an
unpaid fine into community service. The modification of the diversion
agreement shall be in writing and signed by the divertee and the diversion
unit. The number of hours of community service in lieu of a monetary penalty
shall be converted at the rate of the prevailing state minimum wage per hour.

(((16))) (17)
Fines imposed under this section shall be collected and paid into the county
general fund in accordance with procedures established by the juvenile court
administrator under RCW 13.04.040 and may be used only for juvenile services.
In the expenditure of funds for juvenile services, there shall be a maintenance
of effort whereby counties exhaust existing resources before using amounts
collected under this section.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
3. A new section is added
to chapter 13.40 RCW to read as follows:

Youth courts provide a
diversion for cases involving juvenile offenders, in which participants, under
the supervision of an adult coordinator, may serve in various capacities within
the program, acting in the role of jurors, lawyers, bailiffs, clerks, and
judges. Youths who appear before youth courts are youths eligible for
diversion pursuant to RCW 13.40.070 (6) and (7). Youth courts have no
jurisdiction except as provided for in this act. Youth courts are diversion
units and not courts established under Article IV of the state Constitution.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
4. A new section is added
to chapter 13.40 RCW to read as follows:

(1) The office of the
administrator for the courts shall encourage the juvenile courts to work with
cities and counties to implement, expand, or use youth court programs for
juveniles who commit diversion-eligible offenses, civil, or traffic
infractions. Program operations of youth court programs may be funded by
government and private grants. Youth court programs are limited to those that:

(a) Are developed using
the guidelines for creating and operating teen court programs developed by the
American probation and parole association teen courts project;

(b) Target offenders
age eight through seventeen; and

(c) Emphasize the
following principles:

(i) Youth must be held
accountable for their problem behavior;

(ii) Youth must be
educated about the impact their actions have on themselves and others including
their victims, their families, and their community;

(iii) Youth must
develop skills to resolve problems with their peers more effectively; and

(iv) Youth should be
provided a meaningful forum to practice and enhance newly developed skills.

(2) Youth court
programs may be established by law enforcement entities, municipal courts,
district courts, juvenile probation departments, private nonprofit
organizations, and schools, under the supervision of juvenile court.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
5. A new section is added
to chapter 13.40 RCW to read as follows:

(1) Youth courts have
authority over juveniles ages eight through seventeen who:

(a) Along with their
parent, guardian, or legal custodian, voluntarily and in writing request youth
court involvement;

(b) Admit they have
committed the offense they are referred for;

(c) Along with their
parent, guardian, or legal custodian, waive any privilege against
self-incrimination concerning the offense; and

(d) Along with their
parent, guardian, or legal custodian, agree to comply with the youth court
disposition of the case.

(2) Youth courts shall
not exercise authority over youth who are under the continuing jurisdiction of
the juvenile court for law violations, including a youth with a matter pending
before the juvenile court but which has not yet been adjudicated.

(3) Youth courts may
decline to accept a youth for youth court disposition for any reason and may
terminate a youth from youth court participation at any time.

(4) A youth or his or
her parent, guardian, or legal custodian may withdraw from the youth court
process at any time.

(5) Youth courts shall
give any victims of a juvenile the opportunity to be notified, present, and
heard in any youth court proceeding.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
6. A new section is added
to chapter 13.40 RCW to read as follows:

Youth court may not
notify the juvenile court of satisfaction of conditions until all ordered
restitution has been paid.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
7. A new section is added
to chapter 13.40 RCW to read as follows:

Every youth appearing
before a youth court shall be accompanied by his or her parent, guardian, or
legal custodian.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
8. A new section is added
to chapter 13.40 RCW to read as follows:

(1) Youth court
dispositional options include those delineated in RCW 13.40.080, and may also
include:

(a) Participating in
law-related education classes, appropriate counseling, treatment, or other
education programs;

(b) Providing periodic
reports to the youth court;

(c) Participating in
mentoring programs;

(d) Serving as a
participant in future youth court proceedings;

(e) Writing apology
letters; or

(f) Writing essays.

(2) Youth courts shall
not impose a term of confinement or detention. Youth courts may require that
the youth pay reasonable fees to participate in youth court and in classes,
counseling, treatment, or other educational programs that are the disposition
of the youth court.

(3) A youth court
disposition shall be completed within one hundred eighty days from the date of
referral.

(4) Pursuant to RCW
13.40.080(1), a youth court disposition shall be reduced to writing and signed
by the youth and his or her parent, guardian, or legal custodian accepting the
disposition terms.

(5) Youth court shall
notify the juvenile court upon successful or unsuccessful completion of the
disposition.

(6) Youth court shall
notify the prosecutor or probation counselor of a failure to successfully
complete the youth court disposition.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
9. A new section is added
to chapter 13.40 RCW to read as follows:

A youth court may
require that a youth pay a nonrefundable fee, not exceeding thirty dollars, to
cover the costs of administering the program. The fee may be reduced or waived
for a participant. Fees shall be paid to and accounted for by the youth court.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
10. A new section is added
to chapter 28A.300 RCW to read as follows:

The office of the
superintendent of public instruction shall encourage school districts to
implement, expand, or use student court programs for students who commit
violations of school rules and policies. Program operations of student courts
may be funded by government and private grants. Student court programs are
limited to those that:

(1) Are developed using
the guidelines for creating and operating teen court programs developed by the
American probation and parole association teen courts project;

(2) Target violators of
school rules age eight through seventeen; and

(3) Emphasize the
following principles:

(a) Youth must be held
accountable for their problem behavior;

(b) Youth must be
educated about the impact their actions have on themselves and others including
the school, school personnel, their classmates, their families, and their
community;

(c) Youth must develop
skills to resolve problems with their peers more effectively; and

(d) Youth should be
provided a meaningful forum to practice and enhance newly developed skills.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
11. A new section is added
to chapter 28A.320 RCW to read as follows:

Local school boards may
provide for school credit for participation as a member of a youth court as
defined in RCW 13.40.020 or a student court pursuant to section 10 of this act.

Sec. 12. RCW 13.40.250 and 1997 c
338 s 36 are each amended to read as follows:

A traffic or civil
infraction case involving a juvenile under the age of sixteen may be diverted
in accordance with the provisions of this chapter or filed in juvenile court.

(1) If a notice of a
traffic or civil infraction is filed in juvenile court, the juvenile named in
the notice shall be afforded the same due process afforded to adult defendants
in traffic infraction cases.

(2) A monetary penalty
imposed upon a juvenile under the age of sixteen who is found to have committed
a traffic or civil infraction may not exceed one hundred dollars. At the
juvenile's request, the court may order performance of a number of hours of
community service in lieu of a monetary penalty, at the rate of the prevailing
state minimum wage per hour.

(3) A diversion
agreement entered into by a juvenile referred pursuant to this section shall be
limited to thirty hours of community service, or educational or informational
sessions.

(4) Traffic or civil
infractions referred to a youth court pursuant to this section are subject to
the conditions imposed by section 8 of this act.

(5) If a case
involving the commission of a traffic or civil infraction or offense by a
juvenile under the age of sixteen has been referred to a diversion unit, an
abstract of the action taken by the diversion unit may be forwarded to the
department of licensing in the manner provided for in RCW 46.20.270(2).

Sec. 13. RCW 46.63.040 and 1984 c
258 s 137 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) All violations of
state law, local law, ordinance, regulation, or resolution designated as
traffic infractions in RCW 46.63.020 may be heard and determined by a district
court, except as otherwise provided in this section.

(2) Any municipal court
has the authority to hear and determine traffic infractions pursuant to this
chapter.

(3) Any city or town
with a municipal court may contract with the county to have traffic infractions
committed within the city or town adjudicated by a district court.

(4) District court
commissioners have the authority to hear and determine traffic infractions
pursuant to this chapter.

(5) Any district or
municipal court may, with the consent of the juvenile court, refer juveniles
age sixteen or seventeen to a youth court, as defined in RCW 13.40.020, for
traffic infractions.

(6)
The boards of regents of the state universities, and the boards of trustees of
the regional universities and of The Evergreen State College have the authority
to hear and determine traffic infractions under RCW 28B.10.560.

---
END ---