BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF
WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1. RCW 77.65.160 and 2000 c
107 s 37 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) The following
commercial salmon fishery licenses are required for the license holder to use
the specified gear to fish for salmon in state waters. Only a person who meets
the qualifications of RCW 77.70.090 may hold a license listed in this
subsection. The licenses and their annual fees and surcharges under RCW
77.95.090 are:

Fishery Resident Nonresident Surcharge

License Fee Fee

(a) Salmon Gill Net‑-Grays (($380)) $685 plus
$100

Harbor-Columbia river $50

(b) Salmon Gill Net‑-Puget (($380)) $685 plus
$100

Sound $50

(c) Salmon Gill Net‑-Willapa (($380)) $685 plus
$100

Bay-Columbia river $50

(d) Salmon purse seine (($530)) $985 plus $100

$50

(e) Salmon reef net (($380)) $685 plus $100

$50

(f) Salmon troll (($380)) $685 plus $100

$50

(2) A license issued
under this section authorizes no taking or delivery of salmon or other food
fish unless a vessel is designated under RCW 77.65.100.

(3) Holders of
commercial salmon fishery licenses may retain incidentally caught food fish
other than salmon, subject to rules of the department.

(4) A salmon troll
license includes a salmon delivery license.

(5) A salmon gill net
license authorizes the taking of salmon only in the geographical area for which
the license is issued. The geographical designations in subsection (1) of this
section have the following meanings:

(a) "Puget
Sound" includes waters of the Strait of Juan de Fuca, Georgia Strait,
Puget Sound and all bays, inlets, canals, coves, sounds, and estuaries lying
easterly and southerly of the international boundary line and a line at the
entrance to the Strait of Juan de Fuca projected northerly from Cape Flattery
to the lighthouse on Tatoosh Island and then to Bonilla Point on Vancouver
Island.

(b) "Grays
Harbor-Columbia river" includes waters of Grays Harbor and tributary
estuaries lying easterly of a line projected northerly from Point Chehalis
Light to Point Brown and those waters of the Columbia river and tributary
sloughs and estuaries easterly of a line at the entrance to the Columbia river
projected southerly from the most westerly point of the North jetty to the most
westerly point of the South jetty.

(c) "Willapa
Bay-Columbia river" includes waters of Willapa Bay and tributary estuaries
and easterly of a line projected northerly from Leadbetter Point to the Cape
Shoalwater tower and those waters of the Columbia river and tributary sloughs
described in (b) of this subsection.

(6) A commercial salmon
troll fishery license may be renewed under this section if the license holder
notifies the department by May 1st of that year that he or she will not
participate in the fishery during that calendar year. A commercial salmon gill
net, reef net, or seine fishery license may be renewed under this section if
the license holder notifies the department by August 1st of that year that he
or she will not participate in the fishery during that calendar year. The
license holder must pay the one hundred-dollar enhancement surcharge, plus a
fifteen-dollar handling charge, in order to be considered a valid renewal and
eligible to renew the license the following year.

Sec. 2. RCW 82.27.020 and 1999 c
126 s 3 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) In addition to all
other taxes, licenses, or fees provided by law there is established an excise
tax on the commercial possession of enhanced food fish as provided in this
chapter. The tax is levied upon and shall be collected from the owner of the enhanced
food fish whose possession constitutes the taxable event. The taxable event is
the first possession in Washington by an owner. Processing and handling of
enhanced food fish by a person who is not the owner is not a taxable event to
the processor or handler.

(2) A person in
possession of enhanced food fish and liable to this tax may deduct from the
price paid to the person from which the enhanced food fish (except oysters) are
purchased an amount equal to a tax at one-half the rate levied in this section
upon these products.

(3) The measure of the
tax is the value of the enhanced food fish at the point of landing.

(4) The tax shall be
equal to the measure of the tax multiplied by the rates for enhanced food fish
as follows:

(a) Chinook, coho, and
chum salmon and anadromous game fish: ((Five)) Seven and
twenty-five one-hundredths percent;

(b) Pink and sockeye
salmon: ((Three)) Seven and fifteen one-hundredths percent;

(c) Other food fish and
shellfish, except oysters, sea urchins, and sea cucumbers: Two and one-tenth
percent;

(d) Oysters: Eight
one-hundredths of one percent;

(e) Sea urchins: Four
and six-tenths percent through December 31, 2005, and two and one-tenth percent
thereafter; and

(f) Sea cucumbers:
Four and six-tenths percent through December 31, 2005, and two and one-tenth
percent thereafter.

(5) An additional tax
is imposed equal to the rate specified in RCW 82.02.030 multiplied by the tax
payable under subsection (4) of this section.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 3. The secretary of state
shall submit this act to the people for their adoption and ratification, or
rejection, at the next general election to be held in this state, in accordance
with RCW 43.135.090.

---
END ---