BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF
WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec.
1. The purpose of this
chapter is to recognize and validate certain trusts that are established for
the benefit of animals. Under the common law such trusts were unenforceable at
law. The legislature intends that such trusts be recognized as valid, and that
such trusts be enforceable in accordance with their terms.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
2. As used in this chapter,
"animal" means an animal with vertebrae.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
3. A trust for the care of
one or more animals is valid. The animals that are to be benefited by the
trust may be individually identified, or may be identified in such other manner
that they can be readily identified. Unless otherwise provided in the trust
instrument or in this chapter, the trust will terminate when no animal that is
designated as a beneficiary of the trust remains living.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
4. Except as expressly
provided otherwise in the trust instrument or in section 8 of this act, and
except as may be necessary to pay the trustee reasonable compensation and to
reimburse the trustee for reasonable costs incurred on behalf of the trust, no
portion of the principal or income of the trust may be converted to the use of
the trustee or to any use other than for the trust's purpose or for the benefit
of the designated animal or animals.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
5. Upon termination of the
trust, the trustee shall transfer the unexpended trust property in the
following order:

(1) As directed in the
instrument;

(2) If the trust was
created in a nonresiduary clause in the trustor's will or in a codicil to the
trustor's will and the will or codicil does not direct otherwise, under the
residuary clause in the trustor's will, which shall be read as though the
testator died on the date the trust terminated; and

(3) If no taker is
produced by the application of subsection (1) or (2) of this section, to the
trustor's heirs under RCW 11.04.015, as it exists at the time of the trust's
termination.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
6. The intended use of the
principal or income can be enforced by a person designated for that purpose in
the trust instrument, by the person having custody of an animal that is a
beneficiary of the trust, or by a person appointed by a court upon application
to it by any person. A person with an interest in the welfare of the animal
may petition for an order appointing or removing a person designated or
appointed to enforce the trust.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
7. Except as ordered by the
court or required by the trust instrument, no filing, report, registration, or
periodic accounting shall be required of the trust or the trustee.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
8. If no trustee is
designated or no designated trustee is willing or able to serve, the court
shall name a trustee. The court may order the removal of an acting trustee and
the transfer of the property to another trustee if it is necessary or
appropriate in order to assure that the intended use is carried out. A court
may also make such other orders and determinations as shall be advisable to
carry out the intent of the trustor and the purpose of this chapter.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
9. In construing the
language of a trust for an animal, the governing instrument shall be liberally
construed to provide the protections of this chapter. It is presumed that
language contained in a trust for an animal is not merely precatory or honorary
in nature unless it can be shown by clear and cogent evidence that such was the
trustor's intent. Extrinsic evidence is admissible in determining the
trustor's intent.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
10. RCW 11.98.130 through
11.98.160 apply to trusts that are subject to this chapter. If applicable, any
reference in those statutes to a "life or lives in being or conceived at
the effective date of the instrument" shall be construed to refer to any
animal that is a beneficiary of the trust and that is in being or conceived at
the effective date of the instrument.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
11. RCW 11.98.130 through
11.98.160 apply to trusts that are subject to this chapter.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
12. Except as otherwise
provided in the trust instrument or in this chapter, all powers and duties
conferred on a trustee under Washington law also apply to the trustee of a
trust for animals.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
13. This chapter applies to
trusts that are created on or after the effective date of this act and to
trusts that are in existence on the effective date of this act, but that are
revocable by the trustor on the effective date of this act. If a trustor is
incompetent to exercise a power of revocation on the effective date of this
act, this chapter does not apply to such trust unless the trustor later becomes
competent to exercise such power of revocation, in which case this chapter
applies to such trust.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
14. (1) Sections 1 through 9,
12, and 13 of this act take effect October 1, 2001.

(2) Section 10 of this
act takes effect October 1, 2001, if Senate Bill No. 5054, or its legislative
successor bearing the same bill number, does not take effect by October 1,
2001.

(3) Section 11 of this
act takes effect October 1, 2001, if Senate Bill No. 5054, or its legislative
successor bearing the same bill number, takes effect by October 1, 2001.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 15. Sections 1 through 14 of
this act constitute a new chapter in Title 11 RCW.

---
END ---