BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF
WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1. RCW 28B.80.330 and 1997
c 369 s 10 are each amended to read as follows:

The board shall perform
the following planning duties in consultation with the four-year institutions,
the community and technical college system, and when appropriate the work force
training and education coordinating board, the superintendent of public instruction,
and the independent higher educational institutions:

(1) Develop and
establish role and mission statements for each of the four-year institutions
and for the community and technical college system;

(2) Identify the
state's higher education goals, objectives, and priorities;

(3) Prepare a
comprehensive master plan which includes but is not limited to:

(a) Assessments of the
state's higher education needs. These assessments may include, but are not
limited to: The basic and continuing needs of various age groups; business and
industrial needs for a skilled work force; analyses of demographic, social, and
economic trends; consideration of the changing ethnic composition of the
population and the special needs arising from such trends; college attendance,
retention, and dropout rates, and the needs of recent high school graduates and
placebound adults. The board should consider the needs of residents of all
geographic regions, but its initial priorities should be applied to heavily
populated areas underserved by public institutions;

(b) Recommendations on
enrollment and other policies and actions to meet those needs;

(c) Guidelines for
continuing education, adult education, public service, and other higher
education programs;

(d) Mechanisms through
which the state's higher education system can meet the needs of employers
hiring for industrial projects of statewide significance; and

(e) Mechanisms
through which siting of the state's higher education system can support
existing population centers and promote greater use of multimodal
transportation.

The initial plan shall
be submitted to the governor and the legislature by December 1, 1987. Comments
on the plan from the board's advisory committees and the institutions shall be
submitted with the plan.

The plan shall be
updated every four years, and presented to the governor and the appropriate
legislative policy committees. Following public hearings, the legislature
shall, by concurrent resolution, approve or recommend changes to the initial plan,
and the updates. The plan shall then become state higher education policy
unless legislation is enacted to alter the policies set forth in the plan;

(4) Review, evaluate,
and make recommendations on operating and capital budget requests from four-year
institutions and the community and technical college system, based on the
elements outlined in subsections (1), (2), and (3) of this section, and on
guidelines which outline the board's fiscal priorities. These guidelines shall
be distributed to the institutions and the community college board by December
of each odd-numbered year. The institutions and the community college board
shall submit an outline of their proposed budgets, identifying major
components, to the board no later than August 1 of each even-numbered year.
The board shall submit recommendations on the proposed budgets and on the
board's budget priorities to the office of financial management before November
1st of each even-numbered year, and to the legislature by January 1 of each odd-numbered
year;

(5) Institutions and
the state board for community and technical colleges shall submit any
supplemental budget requests and revisions to the board at the same time they
are submitted to the office of financial management. The board shall submit
recommendations on the proposed supplemental budget requests to the office of
financial management by November 1st and to the legislature by January 1st;

(6) Recommend
legislation affecting higher education;

(7) Recommend tuition
and fees policies and levels based on comparisons with peer institutions;

(8) Establish
priorities and develop recommendations on financial aid based on comparisons
with peer institutions;

(9) Prepare
recommendations on merging or closing institutions; and

(10)
Develop criteria for identifying the need for new baccalaureate institutions.

--- END ---