BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF
WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1. RCW 47.05.051 and 1998 c
175 s 12 are each amended to read as follows:

The comprehensive
six-year investment program shall be based upon the needs identified in the
state-owned highway component of the statewide multimodal transportation plan
as defined in RCW 47.01.071(3) and priority selection systems that incorporate
the following criteria:

(1) Priority
programming for the preservation program shall take into account the following,
not necessarily in order of importance:

(a) Extending the
service life of the existing highway system;

(b) Ensuring the
structural ability to carry loads imposed upon highways and bridges; and

(c) Minimizing life
cycle costs. The transportation commission in carrying out the provisions of
this section may delegate to the department of transportation the authority to
select preservation projects to be included in the six-year program.

(2) Priority
programming for the improvement program shall take into account the following,
not necessarily in order of importance:

(a) Support for the
state's economy, including job creation and job preservation;

(b) The cost-effective
movement of people and goods;

(c) Accident and
accident risk reduction;

(d) Protection of the
state's natural environment;

(e) Continuity and
systematic development of the highway transportation network;

(f) Consistency with
local comprehensive plans developed under chapter 36.70A RCW;

(g) Consistency with
regional transportation plans developed under chapter 47.80 RCW;

(h) Public views
concerning proposed improvements;

(i) The conservation of
energy resources;

(j) Feasibility of
financing the full proposed improvement;

(k) Commitments
established in previous legislative sessions;

(l) Relative costs and
benefits of candidate programs;

(m) Major projects
addressing capacity deficiencies which prioritize allowing for preliminary
engineering shall be reprioritized during the succeeding biennium, based upon
updated project data. Reprioritized projects may be delayed or canceled by the
transportation commission if higher priority projects are awaiting funding; ((and))

(n) Major project
approvals which significantly increase a project's scope or cost from original
prioritization estimates shall include a review of the project's estimated
revised priority rank and the level of funding provided. Projects may be
delayed or canceled by the transportation commission if higher priority
projects are awaiting funding;

(o) Support for
development in and revitalization of existing downtowns;

(p) Extent that
development implements local comprehensive plans for rural and urban
residential and nonresidential densities;

(q) Extent of
compact, transit-oriented development at appropriate residential and
nonresidential densities; and

(r) Feasibility of
multimodal transportation.

(3) The commission may depart
from the priority programming established under subsections (1) and (2) of this
section: (a) To the extent that otherwise funds cannot be utilized feasibly
within the program; (b) as may be required by a court judgment, legally binding
agreement, or state and federal laws and regulations; (c) as may be required to
coordinate with federal, local, or other state agency construction projects;
(d) to take advantage of some substantial financial benefit that may be
available; (e) for continuity of route development; or (f) because of changed
financial or physical conditions of an unforeseen or emergent nature. The
commission or secretary of transportation shall maintain in its files
information sufficient to show the extent to which the commission has departed
from the established priority.

(4) The
commission shall identify those projects that yield freight mobility benefits
or that alleviate the impacts of freight mobility upon affected communities.

Sec. 2. RCW 47.06.040 and 1998 c
199 s 1 are each amended to read as follows:

The department shall
develop a statewide multimodal transportation plan under RCW 47.01.071(3) and
in conformance with federal requirements, to ensure the continued mobility of
people and goods within regions and across the state in a safe, cost-effective
manner. The statewide multimodal transportation plan shall consist of:

(1) A state-owned
facilities component, which shall guide state investment for state highways
including bicycle and pedestrian facilities, and state ferries; and

(2) A state-interest
component, which shall define the state interest in aviation, marine ports and
navigation, freight rail, intercity passenger rail, bicycle transportation and
pedestrian walkways, and public transportation, and recommend actions in
coordination with appropriate public and private transportation providers to
ensure that the state interest in these transportation modes is met.

The plans developed
under each component must be consistent with the state transportation policy
plan and with each other, reflect public involvement, be consistent with
regional transportation planning, high-capacity transportation planning, and
local comprehensive plans prepared under chapter 36.70A RCW, and include
analysis of intermodal connections and choices. A primary emphasis for these
plans shall be the relief of congestion, the preservation of existing
investments and downtowns, ability to attract or accommodate planned
population, and employment growth, the improvement of traveler safety, the
efficient movement of freight and goods, and the improvement and integration of
all transportation modes to create a seamless intermodal transportation system
for people and goods.

In the
development of the statewide multimodal transportation plan, the department
shall identify and document potential affected environmental resources,
including, but not limited to, wetlands, storm water runoff, flooding, air
quality, fish passage, and wildlife habitat. The department shall conduct its
environmental identification and documentation in coordination with all
relevant environmental regulatory authorities, including, but not limited to,
local governments. The department shall give the relevant environmental
regulatory authorities an opportunity to review the department's environmental
plans. The relevant environmental regulatory authorities shall provide
comments on the department's environmental plans in a timely manner.
Environmental identification and documentation as provided for in RCW 47.01.300
and this section is not intended to create a private right of action or require
an environmental impact statement as provided in chapter 43.21C RCW.

Sec. 3. RCW 47.66.040 and 1995 c
269 s 2606 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) The transportation
improvement board shall select programs and projects based on a competitive
process consistent with the mandates governing each account or source of
funds. The competition shall be consistent with the following criteria:

(a) Local, regional,
and state transportation plans;

(b) Local transit
development plans; and

(c) Local comprehensive
land use plans.

(2) The following
criteria shall be considered by the board in selecting programs and projects:

(a) Objectives of the
growth management act, the high capacity transportation act, the commute trip
reduction act, transportation demand management programs, federal and state air
quality requirements, and federal Americans with disabilities act and related
state accessibility requirements; ((and))

(b) Energy efficiency
issues, freight and goods movement as related to economic development, regional
significance, rural isolation, the leveraging of other funds including funds
administered by this board, and safety and security issues; and

(c) Land use
implications such as whether the programs and projects:

(i) Support
development in and revitalization of existing downtowns;

(ii) Implement local
comprehensive plans for rural and urban residential and nonresidential
densities;

(iii) Have land use
planning and regulations encouraging compact development at appropriate
residential and nonresidential densities; and

(iv) Promote use of
multimodal transportation.

(3) The
board shall determine the appropriate level of local match required for each
program and project based on the source of funds.

---
END ---