BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF
WASHINGTON:

_4 Sec. 1. RCW
43.05.040 and 1995 c 403 s 605 are each amended to

_5 read as follows:

_6 (1) The owner and operator shall be given a
reasonable period

_7 of time to correct violations identified during a
technical

_8 assistance visit before any civil penalty provided for
by law is

_9 imposed for those violations. A regulatory agency may
revisit a

10 facility, business, or other location after a technical
assistance

11 visit and a reasonable period of time has passed to
correct

12 violations identified by the agency in writing and issue
civil

13 penalties as provided for by law for any uncorrected
violations.

14 (2) During a visit under subsection (1) of this
section, the

15 regulatory agency may not issue civil penalties for
violations not

16 previously identified in a technical assistance
visit, unless the

17 violations are of the type for which the agency may
issue a

18 citation during a technical assistance visit under
RCW 43.05.050.

‑‑‑ END ‑‑‑

p. 1 SHB
2049