BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF
WASHINGTON:

_4 Sec. 1. RCW
34.05.380 and 1989 c 175 s 11 are each amended to read

_5 as follows:

_6 (1) Each agency shall file in the office of the code
reviser a

_7 certified copy of all rules it adopts, except for rules
contained

_8 in tariffs filed with or published by the Washington
utilities and

_9 transportation commission. The code reviser shall place
upon each

10 rule a notation of the time and date of filing and shall
keep a

11 permanent register of filed rules open to public
inspection. In

12 filing a rule, each agency shall use the standard form
prescribed

13 for this purpose by the code reviser.

14 (2)(a) Emergency rules adopted under RCW
34.05.350 become

15 effective upon filing unless a later date is specified
in the

16 order of adoption. All other rules become effective
upon the

17 expiration of thirty days after the ((date of filing))
adjournment

p. 1 HB
2050

_1 of the regular session of the legislature in the
calendar year

_2 after the year in which the rule was adopted,
unless a later date

_3 is required by statute or specified in the order of
adoption.

_4 (b) This subsection (2) does not apply to a rule
authorized to

_5 take effect under subsection (3) of this section.

_6 (3) A rule may become effective immediately upon its
filing

_7 with the code reviser or on any subsequent date earlier
than that

_8 established by subsection (2) of this section, if the
agency

_9 establishes that effective date in the adopting order
and finds

10 that:

11 (a) Such action is required by the state or federal

12 Constitution, a statute, or court order;

13 (b) The rule only delays the effective date of
another rule

14 that is not yet effective; or

15 (c) The earlier effective date is necessary because
of imminent

16 peril to the public health, safety, or welfare.

17 The finding and a brief statement of the reasons
therefor

18 required by this subsection shall be made a part of the
order

19 adopting the rule.

20 (4) With respect to a rule made effective pursuant
to

21 subsection (3) of this section, each agency shall make
reasonable

22 efforts to make the effective date known to persons who
may be

23 affected by it.

24 NEW SECTION. Sec. 2. Section 1 of this act
only applies to

25 rules adopted after the effective date of this act.

‑‑‑ END ‑‑‑

HB 2050 p. 2