BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF
WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1. RCW 4.84.340 and 1995 c
403 s 902 are each amended to read as follows:

Unless the context
clearly requires otherwise, the definitions in this section apply throughout
RCW 4.84.340 through 4.84.360.

(1) "Adjudicative
proceeding" means an adjudicative proceeding as defined in RCW 34.05.010 and
an administrative review under RCW 34.05.464. RCW 4.84.340 through 4.84.360
and sections 4 and 5 of this act apply only to the following adjudicative
proceedings:

(a) Cases conducted
for the department of social and health services, but excluding the division of
child support and the division of juvenile rehabilitation;

(b) Licensing cases
conducted for the liquor control board;

(c) Business and
professional licensing cases for the department of licensing, but excluding
motor vehicle franchise cases under chapter 46.96 RCW;

(d) Business and
professional licensing cases for the department of labor and industries;

(e) Employer
assessment and penalty cases conducted under chapters 49.17, 51.48, and 51.52
RCW for the department of labor and industries; and

(f) Employer
assessment and penalty cases conducted under chapter 50.24 RCW for the
employment security department.

(2)
"Administrative review" means an adjudicative proceeding under RCW
34.05.464.

(3)
"Administrative tribunal" means an independent agency that conducts
adjudicative proceedings, as defined in RCW 34.05.010, as its sole or principal
duty, to: (a) Review decisions of another agency or governmental unit; or (b)
resolve disputes in which the tribunal is not a party.

(4)
"Agency" means any state board, commission, department, institution
of higher education, or officer, authorized by law to make rules or to conduct
adjudicative proceedings, except those in the legislative or judicial branches,
the governor, or the attorney general except to the extent otherwise required
by law.

(((2))) (5)
"Agency action" means agency action as defined by chapter 34.05 RCW.

(((3))) (6)
"Fees and other expenses" includes the reasonable expenses of expert
witnesses, the reasonable cost of a study, analysis, engineering report, test,
or project that is found by the court, presiding officer, or reviewing
officer to be necessary for the preparation of the party's case, and
reasonable attorneys' fees. Reasonable attorneys' fees shall be based on the
prevailing market rates for the kind and quality of services furnished, except
that (a) no expert witness shall be compensated at a rate in excess of the
highest rates of compensation for expert witnesses paid by the state of
Washington, and (b) attorneys' fees shall not be awarded in excess of one
hundred fifty dollars per hour unless the court, presiding officer, or
reviewing officer determines that an increase in the cost of living or a
special factor, such as the limited availability of qualified attorneys for the
proceedings involved, justifies a higher fee.

(((4))) (7)
"Judicial review" means a judicial review as defined by chapter 34.05
RCW.

(8) "Presiding
officer" means a presiding officer under RCW 34.05.425.

(9) "Qualified
administrative party" means (a) an individual whose net worth did not
exceed two hundred fifty thousand dollars at the time the initial petition for
an adjudicatory proceeding was filed, or (b) a sole owner of an unincorporated
business, or a partnership, corporation, association, or organization whose net
worth did not exceed one million two hundred fifty thousand dollars at the time
the initial petition for an adjudicatory proceeding was filed, except that an
organization described in section 501(c)(3) of the federal Internal Revenue
Code of 1954 as exempt from taxation under section 501(a) of the code and a
cooperative association as defined in section 15(a) of the Agricultural
Marketing Act (12 U.S.C. 1141J(a)), may be a party regardless of the net worth
of such organization or cooperative association.

(((5))) (10)
"Qualified judicial party" means (a) an individual whose net
worth did not exceed one million dollars at the time the initial petition for
judicial review was filed, or (b) a sole owner of an unincorporated
business, or a partnership, corporation, association, or organization whose net
worth did not exceed five million dollars at the time the initial petition for
judicial review was filed, except that an organization described in section
501(c)(3) of the federal Internal Revenue Code of 1954 as
exempt from taxation under section 501(a) of the code and a cooperative
association as defined in section 15(a) of the Agricultural Marketing
Act (12 U.S.C. 1141J(a)), may be a party regardless of the net worth of
such organization or cooperative association.

(11) "Qualified
party" means a qualified judicial party or a qualified administrative
party.

(12) "Reviewing
officer" means a reviewing officer under RCW 34.05.464.

Sec. 2. RCW 4.84.350 and 1995 c
403 s 903 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) Except as otherwise
specifically provided by statute, a court shall award a qualified judicial
party that prevails in a judicial review of an agency action and a presiding
officer or reviewing officer shall award a qualified administrative party that
prevails in an adjudicative proceeding challenging an agency action, fees
and other expenses, including reasonable attorneys' fees, unless the court,
presiding officer, or reviewing officer finds that the agency action was
substantially justified or that circumstances make an award unjust. A
qualified party shall be considered to have prevailed if the qualified party
obtained relief on a significant issue that achieves some benefit that the
qualified party sought.

(2) The amount awarded
a qualified party under subsection (1) of this section shall not exceed ((twenty-five))
fifty thousand dollars for the total request for the combined
proceedings, administrative hearing, administrative review, or superior court
proceedings. Subsection (1) of this section shall not apply unless all
parties challenging the agency action are qualified parties. If two or more
qualified parties join in an action, the award in total shall not exceed ((twenty-five))
fifty thousand dollars. The court, presiding officer, or reviewing
officer, in its discretion, may reduce the amount to be awarded ((pursuant
to)) under subsection (1) of this section, or deny any award, to the
extent that a qualified party during the course of the proceedings engaged in
conduct that unduly or unreasonably protracted the final resolution of the
matter in controversy.

(3) The agencies
that conduct their own administrative hearings or administrative reviews under
chapter 34.05 RCW, the chief administrative law judge of the office of
administrative hearings, and the board of industrial insurance appeals are
authorized to adopt rules to implement RCW 4.84.340 through 4.84.360 and
sections 4 and 5 of this act. These rules may include reasonable requirements
for notices of appearances by authorized representatives, requirements for
notices of intent to seek fees under this section, limitations on the
eligibility for fees for nonattorney representatives, and a schedule for hours,
rates, or limitations on amounts of fees and other expenses presumed reasonable
for the type of adjudicative proceeding. In addition, rules may set a maximum
total amount including all fees and expenses for specific types of adjudicative
proceedings.

Sec. 3. RCW 4.84.360 and 1995 c
403 s 904 are each amended to read as follows:

Fees and other expenses
awarded under RCW 4.84.340 and 4.84.350 shall be paid by the agency over which
the party prevails from operating funds appropriated to the agency within sixty
days. Agencies paying fees and other expenses ((pursuant to)) under
RCW 4.84.340 and 4.84.350 shall report all payments to the office of financial
management within five days of paying the fees and other expenses. Fees and
other expenses awarded by the court, presiding officer, or reviewing officer
shall be subject to the provisions of chapter 39.76 RCW and shall be deemed
payable on the date the court, presiding officer, or reviewing officer
announces the award.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
4. A new section is added
to chapter 4.84 RCW to read as follows:

When an agency has made
an offer to participate in an alternative dispute resolution process, the
appellant must participate in good faith or be precluded from applying for an
award of attorneys' fees or expenses under RCW 4.84.340 through 4.84.360, this
section, and section 5 of this act.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
5. A new section is added
to chapter 4.84 RCW to read as follows:

No fees or
other expenses may be awarded against an administrative tribunal.

---
END ---