BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF
WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec.
1. A new section is added
to chapter 34.05 RCW to read as follows:

Rules adopted after the
effective date of this act expire five years after the last day of the year in
which they first took effect. A rule may be continued in effect for additional
five-year periods if it is cited in a list of approved rules contained in an
act of the legislature that becomes law before the expiration of the rule. If
a rule expires, it is considered to be repealed and is of no further force and
effect. An expired rule may not be reactivated by the legislature.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 2. This act takes effect
January 1, 2002.

---
END ---