BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF
WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec.
1. The legislature declares
that students need and deserve a safe and civil school environment in order to
learn and achieve high academic standards. The legislature also finds that
harassment, intimidation, bullying, and other disruptive or violent behaviors
impair learning opportunities for individual and groups of students and, at
times, make students who observe and receive the brunt of those behaviors feel
that school is not a safe place in which to learn and grow. The legislature
also finds that students should learn to treat all people with respect and that
schools have an opportunity to assist their students in learning the importance
of treating all people with respect and civility. The legislature further
finds that when character education is integrated into a school's curriculum,
there is a decline of incidences involving violence, bullying, and harassment,
an increase in student attendance rates, and an enhancement of student learning
opportunities in the positive school climate that results from the programs.
The legislature intends to support programs that local communities, in
partnership with schools or school districts, will design. However, the legislature
intends that each of these education programs include components that help
students learn the importance of treating each other and all people with
respect and civility.

Furthermore, the
legislature finds that students learn by example. The legislature commends
school administrators, faculty, staff, and volunteers for demonstrating
appropriate behavior, treating others with civility and respect, and refusing
to tolerate harassment, intimidation, or bullying.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
2. (1) Subject to
availability of amounts appropriated for this specific purpose, the office of
the superintendent of public instruction shall provide to each school district
that develops and implements a character education program that meets the
requirements of subsection (2) of this section, an equal amount per full-time
equivalent student for the biennium ending June 30, 2003. However, the minimum
allocation to a district shall be two hundred dollars for each school operated
by the district.

(2) Each character
education program shall be developed by locally elected school directors, in
partnership with parents and all interested stakeholders in the local
community. In addition to other character traits and values emphasized, each
program shall include an emphasis on the importance of respectful speech and
conduct and shall recognize the responsibility of each adult in the school to
refuse to tolerate the harassment, intimidation, or bullying of students or
staff by anyone in the school.

(3) A school district
that receives funding in accordance with this section shall certify to the
superintendent of public instruction that funds received were expended for the
purposes of this act.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 3. If specific funding for
the purposes of this act, referencing this act by bill or chapter number, is
not provided by June 30, 2001, in the omnibus appropriations act, this act is
null and void.

---
END ---