BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF
WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1. RCW 43.33A.100 and 1993
c 281 s 50 are each amended to read as follows:

The state investment
board shall maintain appropriate offices and employ such personnel as may be
necessary to perform its duties. Employment by the investment board shall
include but not be limited to an executive director, investment officers, and a
confidential secretary, which positions are exempt from classified service
under chapter 41.06 RCW. Employment of the executive director by the board
shall be for a term of three years, and such employment shall be subject to
confirmation of the state finance committee: PROVIDED, That nothing shall
prevent the board from dismissing the director for cause before the expiration
of the term nor shall anything prohibit the board, with the confirmation of the
state finance committee, from employing the same individual as director in
succeeding terms. Compensation levels for the executive director, a
confidential secretary, and all investment officers, including the
deputy director for investment management, employed by the investment board
shall be established by the ((Washington personnel resources)) state
investment board.

As of July 1, 1981, all
employees classified under chapter 41.06 RCW and engaged in duties assumed by
the state investment board on July 1, 1981, are assigned to the state
investment board. The transfer shall not diminish any rights granted these
employees under chapter 41.06 RCW nor exempt the employees from any action
which may occur thereafter in accordance with chapter 41.06 RCW.

All existing contracts
and obligations pertaining to the functions transferred to the state investment
board in this 1980 act shall remain in full force and effect, and shall be
performed by the board. None of the transfers directed by this 1980 act shall
affect the validity of any act performed by a state entity or by any official
or employee thereof prior to July 1, 1981.

Sec. 2. RCW 43.03.028 and 1995 c
67 s 1 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) There is hereby
created a state committee on agency officials' salaries to consist of seven
members, or their designees, as follows: The president of the University of
Puget Sound; the chairperson of the council of presidents of the state's
four-year institutions of higher education; the chairperson of the Washington
personnel resources board; the president of the Association of Washington
Business; the president of the Pacific Northwest Personnel Managers'
Association; the president of the Washington State Bar Association; and the
president of the Washington State Labor Council. If any of the titles or
positions mentioned in this subsection are changed or abolished, any person
occupying an equivalent or like position shall be qualified for appointment by
the governor to membership upon the committee.

(2) The committee shall
study the duties and salaries of the directors of the several departments and
the members of the several boards and commissions of state government, who are
subject to appointment by the governor or whose salaries are fixed by the
governor, and of the chief executive officers of the following agencies of
state government:

The arts commission;
the human rights commission; the board of accountancy; the board of pharmacy;
the eastern Washington historical society; the Washington state historical
society; the interagency committee for outdoor recreation; the criminal justice
training commission; the department of personnel; ((the state finance
committee;)) the state library; the traffic safety commission; the horse
racing commission; the advisory council on vocational education; the public
disclosure commission; the state conservation commission; the commission on
Hispanic affairs; the commission on Asian Pacific American affairs; the state
board for volunteer fire fighters and reserve officers; the
transportation improvement board; the public employment relations commission;
the forest practices appeals board; and the energy facilities site evaluation
council.

The committee shall
report to the governor or the chairperson of the appropriate salary fixing
authority at least once in each fiscal biennium on such date as the governor
may designate, but not later than seventy-five days prior to the convening of
each regular session of the legislature during an odd-numbered year, its
recommendations for the salaries to be fixed for each position.

(3)
Committee members shall be reimbursed by the department of personnel for travel
expenses under RCW 43.03.050 and 43.03.060.

---
END ---