BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF
WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1. RCW 46.68.010 and 1997 c
22 s 1 are each amended to read as follows:

Whenever any license
fee, paid under the provisions of this title, has been erroneously paid, either
wholly or in part, the payor is entitled to have refunded the amount so
erroneously paid. A license fee is refundable in one or more of the following
circumstances: (1) If the vehicle for which the renewal license was purchased
was destroyed before the beginning date of the registration period for which the
renewal fee was paid; (2) if the vehicle for which the renewal license was
purchased was permanently removed from the state before the beginning date of
the registration period for which the renewal fee was paid; (3) if the vehicle
license was purchased after the owner has sold the vehicle; (4) if the vehicle
is currently licensed in Washington and is subsequently licensed in another
jurisdiction, in which case any full months of Washington fees between the date
of license application in the other jurisdiction and the expiration of the
Washington license are refundable; or (5) if the vehicle for which the renewal
license was purchased is sold before the beginning date of the registration
period for which the renewal fee was paid, and the payor returns the new,
unused, never affixed license renewal tabs to the department before the
beginning of the registration period for which the registration was purchased.
Upon the refund being certified to the state treasurer by the director as
correct and being claimed in the time required by law the state treasurer shall
mail or deliver the amount of each refund to the person entitled thereto. ((No
claim for refund shall be allowed for such erroneous payments unless filed with
the director within three years after such claimed erroneous payment was made.))

If due to error a
person has been required to pay a vehicle license fee under this title and an
excise tax under Title 82 RCW that amounts to an overpayment of ten dollars or
more, that person shall be entitled to a refund of the entire amount of the
overpayment, regardless of whether a refund of the overpayment has been
requested. If due to error the department or its agent has failed to collect
the full amount of the license fee and excise tax due and the underpayment is
in the amount of ten dollars or more, the department shall charge and collect
such additional amount as will constitute full payment of the tax and fees.

Any person who makes a
false statement under which he or she obtains a refund to which he or she is
not entitled under this section is guilty of a gross misdemeanor.

Sec. 2. RCW 82.44.120 and 1993 c
307 s 3 are each amended to read as follows:

Whenever any person has
paid a motor vehicle license fee, and together therewith has paid an excise tax
imposed under the provisions of this chapter, and the director determines that
the payor is entitled to a refund of the entire amount of the license fee as
provided by law, then the payor shall also be entitled to a refund of the
entire excise tax collected under the provisions of this chapter. In case the
director determines that any person is entitled to a refund of only a part of
the license fee so paid, the payor shall be entitled to a refund of the
difference, if any, between the excise tax collected and that which should have
been collected.

In case no claim is to
be made for the refund of the license fee or any part thereof, but claim is
made by any person that he or she has paid an erroneously excessive amount of
excise tax, the department shall determine in the manner generally provided in
this chapter the amount of such excess, if any, that has been paid and shall
certify to the state treasurer that such person is entitled to a refund in such
amount.

In any case where due
to error, a person has been required to pay an excise tax pursuant to this
chapter and a vehicle license fee pursuant to Title 46 RCW which amounts to an
overpayment of ten dollars or more, such person shall be entitled to a refund
of the entire amount of such overpayment, regardless of whether or not a refund
of the overpayment has been requested. Conversely, if due to error, the
department or its agents has failed to collect the full amount of the license
fee and excise tax due, which underpayment is in the amount of ten dollars or
more, the department shall charge and collect such additional amount as will
constitute full payment of the tax.

((Any claim for
refund of an erroneously excessive amount of excise tax or overpayment of
excise tax with a motor vehicle license fee must be filed with the director
within three years after the claimed erroneous payment was made.))

If the department
approves the claim it shall notify the state treasurer to that effect, and the
treasurer shall make such approved refunds from the general fund and shall mail
or deliver the same to the person entitled thereto.

Any person
making any false statement under which he or she obtains any amount of refund
to which he or she is not entitled under the provisions of this section is
guilty of a gross misdemeanor.

---
END ---