BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF
WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1. RCW 48.43.515 and 2000 c
5 s 7 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) Each enrollee in a
health plan must have adequate choice among health care providers.

(2) Each carrier must
allow an enrollee to choose a primary care provider who is accepting new
enrollees from a list of participating providers. Enrollees also must be
permitted to change primary care providers at any time with the change becoming
effective no later than the beginning of the month following the enrollee's
request for the change.

(3) Each carrier must
have a process whereby an enrollee with a complex or serious medical or
psychiatric condition may receive a standing referral to a participating
specialist for an extended period of time.

(4) Each carrier must
provide for appropriate and timely referral of enrollees to a choice of
specialists within the plan if specialty care is warranted. If the type of
medical specialist needed for a specific condition is not represented on the
specialty panel, enrollees must have access to nonparticipating specialty
health care providers.

(5) Each carrier shall
provide enrollees with direct access to the participating chiropractor of the
enrollee's choice for covered chiropractic health care without the necessity of
prior referral. Nothing in this subsection shall prevent carriers from
restricting enrollees to seeing only providers who have signed participating
provider agreements or from utilizing other managed care and cost containment
techniques and processes. For purposes of this subsection, "covered
chiropractic health care" means covered benefits and limitations related
to chiropractic health services as stated in the plan's medical coverage
agreement, with the exception of any provisions related to prior referral for
services.

(6) Each carrier must
provide, upon the request of an enrollee, access by the enrollee to a second
opinion regarding any medical diagnosis or treatment plan from a qualified
participating provider of the enrollee's choice.

(7) Each carrier must
cover services of a primary care provider whose contract with the plan or whose
contract with a subcontractor is being terminated by the plan or subcontractor
without cause under the terms of that contract for at least sixty days
following notice of termination to the enrollees or, in group coverage
arrangements involving periods of open enrollment, only until the end of the
next open enrollment period. The provider's relationship with the carrier or
subcontractor must be continued on the same terms and conditions as those of the
contract the plan or subcontractor is terminating, except for any provision
requiring that the carrier assign new enrollees to the terminated provider.

(8) Every carrier shall
meet the standards set forth in this section and any rules adopted by the commissioner
to implement this section. In developing rules to implement this section, the
commissioner shall consider relevant standards adopted by national managed care
accreditation organizations and state agencies that purchase managed health
care services.

(9) Each carrier
shall:

(a) Include all
primary care providers who are selected by covered persons of the plan for the
provision of health care provided by the plan that falls within the statutory
scope of practice of the respective primary provider;

(b) Permit any
licensed provider who meets the plans credentialing standards and agrees to
abide by the terms, conditions, reimbursement rates, and standards of quality
of the health plan to serve as a participating primary provider to any person
covered by the plan;

(c) Guarantee that
all covered persons who are eligible for benefits under a health benefit plan
shall have direct access to the primary provider of their choice independent
of, and without referral from, any other provider or entity;

(d) Not discriminate
between individual providers or classes of providers in the amount of
reimbursement, copayment, or other financial compensation for the same or
essentially similar services provided by the health benefit plan; and

(e) Not
promote or recommend any individual provider or class of providers to a covered
person by any method or means.

--- END ---