BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF
WASHINGTON:

_6 NEW SECTION. Sec. 1. It is the intent of
the legislature to

_7 ease the burden on persons buying their first home.
Individuals and

_8 families who work hard and are ready to make the huge
financial

_9 commitment of home ownership deserve some support.
Helping first-

10 time home buyers will promote stronger communities and
will give

11 more families the ability to raise their children in a
stable

12 environment.

13 NEW SECTION. Sec. 2. A new section is
added to chapter 84.36

14 RCW to read as follows:

15 (1) A residence owned and occupied by a first-time
home buyer

16 is exempt from taxes levied by the state for the first
four

17 assessment years subsequent to purchase by the
first-time home

p. 1 HB
2061

_1 buyer, if the income of the first-time home buyer in the
first

_2 year the exemption is claimed does not exceed one
hundred fifteen

_3 percent of the state median income.

_4 (2) The definitions in this subsection apply for the
purposes

_5 of this section.

_6 (a) "First-time home buyer" means an
individual or his or her

_7 spouse who has not owned a home during the three-year
period

_8 before the purchase of a home.

_9 (b) "State median income" means the median
income for four-

10 person families as prepared by the federal bureau of the
census

11 and reported annually in the federal register.

12 (c) "Residence" is defined as provided in
RCW 84.36.383.

13 NEW SECTION. Sec. 3. A new section is
added to chapter 84.36

14 RCW to read as follows:

15 (1) A claim for exemption under section 2 of this
act may be

16 filed with the assessor at any time during the year for
exemption

17 from taxes levied for collection beginning the following
year.

18 (2) If the assessor finds that the applicant does
not meet the

19 qualifications under section 2 of this act, the claim
will be

20 denied but this denial may be appealed under RCW
84.48.010.

21 (3) A claim for exemption under section 2 of this
act must be

22 made upon forms prescribed by the department and must be

23 accompanied by documented verification of income as
required under

24 rules of the department.

25 (4) Any person signing a false claim with the intent
to defraud

26 or evade the payment of any tax is guilty of the offense
of

27 perjury.

28 (5) The department of revenue may conduct audits of
the

29 administration of section 2 of this act and the claims
for

30 exemption filed thereunder. The powers of the
department under

31 chapter 84.08 RCW apply to these audits.

32 (6) Any information or facts concerning confidential
income

33 data obtained by the assessor or the department of
revenue, or

34 their agents or employees, under this section will be
used only to

35 administer section 2 of this act. Notwithstanding any
provision of

36 law to the contrary, absent written consent by the
person about

37 whom the information or facts have been obtained, the
confidential

HB 2061 p. 2

_1 income data will not be disclosed by the assessor or the

_2 assessor's agents or employees to anyone other than the
department

_3 of revenue or the department's agents or employees nor
by the

_4 department of revenue or the department's agents or
employees to

_5 anyone other than the assessor or the assessor's agents
or

_6 employees except in a judicial proceeding pertaining to
the

_7 taxpayer's entitlement to the tax exemption under
section 2 of

_8 this act. A violation of this subsection is a
misdemeanor.

_9 NEW SECTION. Sec. 4. Section 2 of this act
applies to taxes

10 levied for collection in 2003 and thereafter.

11 NEW SECTION. Sec. 5. This act takes effect
if the proposed

12 amendment to Article VII of the state Constitution
providing tax

13 relief for first-time home buyers (House Joint
Resolution . . . (H-

14 1593/01)) is validly submitted to and is approved and
ratified by

15 the voters at the next general election. If the
proposed amendment

16 is not approved and ratified, this act is void in its
entirety.

‑‑‑ END ‑‑‑

p. 3 HB
2061