BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF
WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec.
1. A new section is added
to chapter 82.14 RCW to read as follows:

(1) The department
shall determine before January 1st of each year the total and the per capita
amount of revenues for each city imposing the sales and use tax authorized
under RCW 82.14.030(1) for the previous calendar year. For a city with an
official incorporation date after January 1st of the previous calendar year,
the department shall estimate the total and per capita amount of revenues from
the tax authorized under RCW 82.14.030(1) that the new city would have received
had the city received revenues from the tax the entire calendar year.

Based on these
calculations, the department shall determine before January 1st of each year
the statewide weighted average per capita level of revenues for all cities
imposing the sales and use tax authorized under RCW 82.14.030(1) for the
previous calendar year.

(2) Except as provided
in subsections (3) and (4) of this section, for the taxes imposed under chapter
82.08 or 82.12 RCW, the treasurer shall distribute to eligible cities no later
than January 1st of each year the portion of the tax that is collected during
the previous calendar year within the taxing jurisdiction of an eligible city
that is in excess of the amount collected in the year prior to the previous
calendar year, less the amount of growth in collections attributable to
inflation and to population growth within the taxing jurisdiction.

(3) For an eligible
city with an incorporation date after January 1st of the year prior to the
previous calendar year, for the taxes imposed under chapter 82.08 or 82.12 RCW,
the treasurer shall distribute no later than January 1st of the year the
portion of the tax that is collected within the taxing jurisdiction during the
previous calendar year after the anniversary date of incorporation that is in
excess of the amount collected in the year prior to the previous calendar year,
less the amount of growth in collections attributable to inflation and to
population growth within the taxing jurisdiction.

(4) If the full amount
of the distribution provided in this section, when added to the total revenue
collected by the jurisdiction for the tax imposed under RCW 82.14.030(1), would
result in a per capita level of revenue that exceeds seventy percent of the
statewide weighted average per capita revenue as provided in subsection (1) of
this section, the treasurer shall reduce the distribution so that, when added
to the total revenue collected by the jurisdiction for the tax imposed under
RCW 82.14.030(1), the total equals seventy percent of the statewide weighted
average per capita revenue as provided in subsection (1) of this section.

(5) For
the purposes of this section, "eligible city" means a city imposing
the sales and use tax under RCW 82.14.030(1) at the maximum rate and receiving
less than seventy percent of the statewide weighted average per capita level of
revenues for all cities for the previous calendar year as determined by the
department under subsection (1) of this section. "Eligible city"
does not include a city with an official incorporation date after January 1st
of the previous calendar year.

--- END ---