BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF
WASHINGTON:

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 1. It is the intent of the
legislature that improved county law library services be provided through
increased efficiencies in operation and through alternatives to increasing
civil filing fees as a source of funding.

---
END ---