BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF
WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec.
1. A new section is added
to chapter 27.04 RCW to read as follows:

The state
library, in conjunction with the department of general administration and the
state law library, shall undertake a study of the feasibility, cost-efficiency,
and effectiveness of contracting with a private vendor or vendors for the
capacity to provide statewide online legal research services to any resident of
the state through subscription with the state library.

--- END ---