BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF
WASHINGTON:

_6 NEW SECTION. Sec. 1. (1) In Troxel v.
Granville, No. 99-138,

_7 decided June 5, 2000, the United States supreme court
recognized

_8 that the right of parents in the care and custody of
their

_9 children is a fundamental liberty interest. The court
also

10 acknowledged that demographic changes in the past
century have

11 created complex family structures, and third-party
visitation

12 statutes reflect the changing realities of the American
family.

13 (2) Legislatures and courts across the country
recognize that

14 families are composed of individuals who share an
emotional

15 attachment and intimacy developed over time, and that
such

16 emotional bonds do not necessarily require biological or
marital

17 relationships. By acting in a caregiver or other
significant

18 emotionally involved role over a period of time, a third
party may

p. 1 HB
2065

_1 develop a substantial relationship with a child. In
some cases,

_2 arbitrarily depriving the child of that relationship can
cause

_3 psychological or emotional harm to the child. The
legislature seeks

_4 to prevent the harm to children caused by the disruption
of such

_5 significant bonds.

_6 NEW SECTION. Sec. 2. A new section is
added to chapter 26.10

_7 RCW to read as follows:

_8 (1) A person who is not a parent of the child may
petition the

_9 court for visitation with the child if the petitioner
can

10 demonstrate that:

11 (a) There is a substantial relationship between the
petitioner

12 and the child;

13 (b) The petitioner has been unreasonably denied
visitation with

14 the child by a parent, custodian, or other person with
primary

15 decision-making authority over the child; and

16 (c) There has been a significant change in
circumstances with

17 either the child, the petitioner, or the parent,
custodian, or

18 other person having primary decision-making authority
over the

19 child that threatens the substantial relationship
between the

20 child and the petitioner. The change in circumstances
could

21 include, but is not limited to, a dissolution, legal
separation,

22 informal physical separation, death of a parent, or
other

23 significant change in the family structure.

24 (2)(a) If the court dismisses a petition for
visitation brought

25 under this section because the petitioner failed to
demonstrate

26 the requirements in subsection (1) of this section, the
court must

27 order the petitioner to pay reasonable attorneys' fees
and costs

28 to the party responding to the petition. Nothing in
this subsection

29 precludes a court from ordering attorneys' fees and
costs under

30 RCW 26.10.080.

31 (b) Petitions that are not dismissed by the court
must be

32 submitted to mandatory mediation before proceeding to
trial. Upon

33 petition of any party that mediation is not appropriate,
the court

34 may order or the mediator may determine that the case is
not

35 appropriate for mediation. Mediation shall be pursuant
to mediation

36 procedures established by court rules for third-party
visitation

37 cases.

HB 2065 p. 2

_1 (3)(a) Except as provided in (b) of this subsection,
a petition

_2 for visitation brought under this section must be filed
in the

_3 county in which the child resides.

_4 (b) If a dissolution, legal separation, modification
of

_5 parenting plan, or other custody proceeding is pending
involving

_6 the child, the petition for visitation under this
section shall be

_7 filed in the county in which the proceeding is pending.

_8 (4) The court may order visitation between the
petitioner and

_9 the child if the petitioner shows and the court finds
that:

10 (a) Denial of court-ordered visitation would result
in a

11 likelihood of harm to the child's physical,
psychological, or

12 emotional well-being;

13 (b) The likelihood of harm is beyond the normal
short-term

14 distress a child suffers due to a change in
circumstances;

15 (c) Continuation of the substantial relationship
between the

16 child and the petitioner would likely have long-term
benefits to

17 the child; and

18 (d) Visitation would not substantially interfere
with the

19 relationship between the child and the parent,
custodian, or other

20 person with primary decision-making authority over the
child.

21 (5) In determining the nature and extent of
visitation, the

22 court must consider the wishes of a child who is
sufficiently

23 mature to express reasoned and independent preferences
as to

24 visitation issues.

25 (6) The restrictions of RCW 26.10.160 that apply to
parents

26 shall apply to the petitioner under this section.

27 (7) For the purposes of this section:

28 (a) "Person who is not a parent of the
child" means a person,

29 other than the parent, who is related to the child by
blood or

30 would be related to the child by blood but for the fact
the child

31 is adopted, or who is related to the parent or child by
marriage

32 or would be related to the parent or child by marriage
but for the

33 fact the parents are not or have never been married, or
who lived

34 with the child in a parental or quasi-parental
relationship; and

35 (b) "Unreasonably denied" means a denial
of visitation with the

36 child for irrational or unsubstantiated reasons.

37

p. 3 HB
2065

_1 Sec. 3. RCW
26.09.240 and 1996 c 177 s 1 are each amended to read

_2 as follows:

_3 (1) Under section 2 of this act, a person
other than a parent

_4 may petition the court for visitation with a child ((at
any time))

_5 or may intervene in a pending dissolution, legal
separation, or

_6 modification of parenting plan proceeding. ((A
person other than a

_7 parent may not petition for visitation under this
section unless

_8 the child's parent or parents have commenced an
action under this

_9 chapter.

10 (2) A petition for visitation with a child by a
person other

11 than a parent must be filed in the county in which
the child

12 resides.

13 (3) A petition for visitation or a motion to
intervene pursuant

14 to this section shall be dismissed unless the
petitioner or

15 intervenor can demonstrate by clear and convincing
evidence that a

16 significant relationship exists with the child with
whom

17 visitation is sought. If the petition or motion is
dismissed for

18 failure to establish the existence of a significant
relationship,

19 the petitioner or intervenor shall be ordered to pay
reasonable

20 attorney's fees and costs to the parent, parents,
other custodian,

21 or representative of the child who responds to this
petition or

22 motion.

23 (4) The court may order visitation between the
petitioner or

24 intervenor and the child between whom a significant
relationship

25 exists upon a finding supported by the evidence that
the

26 visitation is in the child's best interests.

27 (5)(a) Visitation with a grandparent shall be
presumed to be in

28 the child's best interests when a significant
relationship has

29 been shown to exist. This presumption may be
rebutted by a

30 preponderance of evidence showing that visitation
would endanger

31 the child's physical, mental, or emotional health.

32 (b) If the court finds that reasonable visitation
by a

33 grandparent would be in the child's best interest
except for

34 hostilities that exist between the grandparent and
one or both of

35 the parents or person with whom the child lives, the
court may set

36 the matter for mediation under RCW 26.09.015.

37 (6) The court may consider the following factors
when making a

38 determination of the child's best interests:

HB 2065 p. 4

_1 (a) The strength of the relationship between the
child and the

_2 petitioner;

_3 (b) The relationship between each of the child's
parents or the

_4 person with whom the child is residing and the
petitioner;

_5 (c) The nature and reason for either parent's
objection to

_6 granting the petitioner visitation;

_7 (d) The effect that granting visitation will have
on the

_8 relationship between the child and the child's
parents or the

_9 person with whom the child is residing;

10 (e) The residential time sharing arrangements
between the

11 parents;

12 (f) The good faith of the petitioner;

13 (g) Any criminal history or history of physical,
emotional, or

14 sexual abuse or neglect by the petitioner; and

15 (h) Any other factor relevant to the child's best
interest.

16 (7) The restrictions of RCW 26.09.191 that apply
to parents

17 shall be applied to a petitioner or intervenor who is
not a

18 parent. The nature and extent of visitation, subject
to these

19 restrictions, is in the discretion of the court.

20 (8) The court may order an investigation and
report concerning

21 the proposed visitation or may appoint a guardian ad
litem as

22 provided in RCW 26.09.220.

23 (9) Visitation granted pursuant to this section
shall be

24 incorporated into the parenting plan for the child.

25 (10) The court may modify or terminate visitation
rights

26 granted pursuant to this section in any subsequent
modification

27 action upon a showing that the visitation is no
longer in the best

28 interest of the child.))

29 Sec. 4. RCW
26.10.160 and 1996 c 303 s 2 are each amended to read

30 as follows:

31 (1) A parent not granted custody of the child is
entitled to

32 reasonable visitation rights except as provided in
subsection (2)

33 of this section.

34 (2)(a) Visitation with the child shall be limited if
it is

35 found that the parent seeking visitation has engaged in
any of the

36 following conduct: (i) Willful abandonment that
continues for an

37 extended period of time or substantial refusal to
perform

p. 5 HB
2065

_1 parenting functions; (ii) physical, sexual, or a pattern
of

_2 emotional abuse of a child; (iii) a history of acts of
domestic

_3 violence as defined in RCW 26.50.010(1) or an assault or
sexual

_4 assault which causes grievous bodily harm or the fear of
such

_5 harm; or (iv) the parent has been convicted as an adult
of a sex

_6 offense under:

_7 (A) RCW 9A.44.076 if, because of the difference in
age between

_8 the offender and the victim, no rebuttable presumption
exists

_9 under (d) of this subsection;

10 (B) RCW 9A.44.079 if, because of the difference in
age between

11 the offender and the victim, no rebuttable presumption
exists

12 under (d) of this subsection;

13 (C) RCW 9A.44.086 if, because of the difference in
age between

14 the offender and the victim, no rebuttable presumption
exists

15 under (d) of this subsection;

16 (D) RCW 9A.44.089;

17 (E) RCW 9A.44.093;

18 (F) RCW 9A.44.096;

19 (G) RCW 9A.64.020 (1) or (2) if, because of the
difference in

20 age between the offender and the victim, no rebuttable
presumption

21 exists under (d) of this subsection;

22 (H) Chapter 9.68A RCW;

23 (I) Any predecessor or antecedent statute for the
offenses

24 listed in (a)(iv)(A) through (H) of this subsection;

25 (J) Any statute from any other jurisdiction that
describes an

26 offense analogous to the offenses listed in (a)(iv)(A)
through (H)

27 of this subsection.

28 This subsection (2)(a) shall not apply when (c) or
(d) of this

29 subsection applies.

30 (b) The parent's visitation with the child shall be
limited if

31 it is found that the parent resides with a person who
has engaged

32 in any of the following conduct: (i) Physical, sexual,
or a pattern

33 of emotional abuse of a child; (ii) a history of acts of
domestic

34 violence as defined in RCW 26.50.010(1) or an assault or
sexual

35 assault that causes grievous bodily harm or the fear of
such harm;

36 or (iii) the person has been convicted as an adult or as
a

37 juvenile has been adjudicated of a sex offense under:

HB 2065 p. 6

_1 (A) RCW 9A.44.076 if, because of the difference in
age between

_2 the offender and the victim, no rebuttable presumption
exists

_3 under (e) of this subsection;

_4 (B) RCW 9A.44.079 if, because of the difference in
age between

_5 the offender and the victim, no rebuttable presumption
exists

_6 under (e) of this subsection;

_7 (C) RCW 9A.44.086 if, because of the difference in
age between

_8 the offender and the victim, no rebuttable presumption
exists

_9 under (e) of this subsection;

10 (D) RCW 9A.44.089;

11 (E) RCW 9A.44.093;

12 (F) RCW 9A.44.096;

13 (G) RCW 9A.64.020 (1) or (2) if, because of the
difference in

14 age between the offender and the victim, no rebuttable
presumption

15 exists under (e) of this subsection;

16 (H) Chapter 9.68A RCW;

17 (I) Any predecessor or antecedent statute for the
offenses

18 listed in (b)(iii)(A) through (H) of this subsection;

19 (J) Any statute from any other jurisdiction that
describes an

20 offense analogous to the offenses listed in (b)(iii)(A)
through

21 (H) of this subsection.

22 This subsection (2)(b) shall not apply when (c) or (e)
of this

23 subsection applies.

24 (c) If a parent has been found to be a sexual
predator under

25 chapter 71.09 RCW or under an analogous statute of any
other

26 jurisdiction, the court shall restrain the parent from
contact

27 with a child that would otherwise be allowed under this
chapter.

28 If a parent resides with an adult or a juvenile who has
been found

29 to be a sexual predator under chapter 71.09 RCW or under
an

30 analogous statute of any other jurisdiction, the court
shall

31 restrain the parent from contact with the parent's child
except

32 contact that occurs outside that person's presence.

33 (d) There is a rebuttable presumption that a parent
who has

34 been convicted as an adult of a sex offense listed in
(d)(i)

35 through (ix) of this subsection poses a present danger
to a

36 child. Unless the parent rebuts this presumption, the
court shall

37 restrain the parent from contact with a child that would
otherwise

38 be allowed under this chapter:

p. 7 HB 2065

_1 (i) RCW 9A.64.020 (1) or (2), provided that the
person

_2 convicted was at least five years older than the other
person;

_3 (ii) RCW 9A.44.073;

_4 (iii) RCW 9A.44.076, provided that the person
convicted was at

_5 least eight years older than the victim;

_6 (iv) RCW 9A.44.079, provided that the person
convicted was at

_7 least eight years older than the victim;

_8 (v) RCW 9A.44.083;

_9 (vi) RCW 9A.44.086, provided that the person
convicted was at

10 least eight years older than the victim;

11 (vii) RCW 9A.44.100;

12 (viii) Any predecessor or antecedent statute for the
offenses

13 listed in (d)(i) through (vii) of this subsection;

14 (ix) Any statute from any other jurisdiction that
describes an

15 offense analogous to the offenses listed in (d)(i)
through (vii)

16 of this subsection.

17 (e) There is a rebuttable presumption that a parent
who resides

18 with a person who, as an adult, has been convicted, or
as a

19 juvenile has been adjudicated, of the sex offenses
listed in

20 (e)(i) through (ix) of this subsection places a child at
risk of

21 abuse or harm when that parent exercises visitation in
the

22 presence of the convicted or adjudicated person. Unless
the parent

23 rebuts the presumption, the court shall restrain the
parent from

24 contact with the parent's child except for contact that
occurs

25 outside of the convicted or adjudicated person's
presence:

26 (i) RCW 9A.64.020 (1) or (2), provided that the
person

27 convicted was at least five years older than the other
person;

28 (ii) RCW 9A.44.073;

29 (iii) RCW 9A.44.076, provided that the person
convicted was at

30 least eight years older than the victim;

31 (iv) RCW 9A.44.079, provided that the person
convicted was at

32 least eight years older than the victim;

33 (v) RCW 9A.44.083;

34 (vi) RCW 9A.44.086, provided that the person
convicted was at

35 least eight years older than the victim;

36 (vii) RCW 9A.44.100;

37 (viii) Any predecessor or antecedent statute for the
offenses

38 listed in (e)(i) through (vii) of this subsection;

HB 2065 p. 8

_1 (ix) Any statute from any other jurisdiction that
describes an

_2 offense analogous to the offenses listed in (e)(i)
through (vii)

_3 of this subsection.

_4 (f) The presumption established in (d) of this
subsection may

_5 be rebutted only after a written finding that:

_6 (i) If the child was not the victim of the sex
offense

_7 committed by the parent requesting visitation, (A)
contact between

_8 the child and the offending parent is appropriate and
poses

_9 minimal risk to the child, and (B) the offending parent
has

10 successfully engaged in treatment for sex offenders or
is engaged

11 in and making progress in such treatment, if any was
ordered by a

12 court, and the treatment provider believes such contact
is

13 appropriate and poses minimal risk to the child; or

14 (ii) If the child was the victim of the sex offense
committed

15 by the parent requesting visitation, (A) contact between
the child

16 and the offending parent is appropriate and poses
minimal risk to

17 the child, (B) if the child is in or has been in therapy
for

18 victims of sexual abuse, the child's counselor believes
such

19 contact between the child and the offending parent is in
the

20 child's best interest, and (C) the offending parent has

21 successfully engaged in treatment for sex offenders or
is engaged

22 in and making progress in such treatment, if any was
ordered by a

23 court, and the treatment provider believes such contact
is

24 appropriate and poses minimal risk to the child.

25 (g) The presumption established in (e) of this
subsection may

26 be rebutted only after a written finding that:

27 (i) If the child was not the victim of the sex
offense

28 committed by the person who is residing with the parent
requesting

29 visitation, (A) contact between the child and the parent
residing

30 with the convicted or adjudicated person is appropriate
and that

31 parent is able to protect the child in the presence of
the

32 convicted or adjudicated person, and (B) the convicted
or

33 adjudicated person has successfully engaged in treatment
for sex

34 offenders or is engaged in and making progress in such
treatment,

35 if any was ordered by a court, and the treatment
provider believes

36 such contact is appropriate and poses minimal risk to
the child;

37 or

38 (ii) If the child was the victim of the sex offense
committed

p. 9 HB
2065

_1 by the person who is residing with the parent requesting

_2 visitation, (A) contact between the child and the parent
in the

_3 presence of the convicted or adjudicated person is
appropriate and

_4 poses minimal risk to the child, (B) if the child is in
or has

_5 been in therapy for victims of sexual abuse, the child's
counselor

_6 believes such contact between the child and the parent
residing

_7 with the convicted or adjudicated person in the presence
of the

_8 convicted or adjudicated person is in the child's best
interest,

_9 and (C) the convicted or adjudicated person has
successfully

10 engaged in treatment for sex offenders or is engaged in
and making

11 progress in such treatment, if any was ordered by a
court, and the

12 treatment provider believes contact between the parent
and child

13 in the presence of the convicted or adjudicated person
is

14 appropriate and poses minimal risk to the child.

15 (h) If the court finds that the parent has met the
burden of

16 rebutting the presumption under (f) of this subsection,
the court

17 may allow a parent who has been convicted as an adult of
a sex

18 offense listed in (d)(i) through (ix) of this subsection
to have

19 visitation with the child supervised by a neutral and
independent

20 adult and pursuant to an adequate plan for supervision
of such

21 visitation. The court shall not approve of a supervisor
for contact

22 between the child and the parent unless the court finds,
based on

23 the evidence, that the supervisor is willing and capable
of

24 protecting the child from harm. The court shall revoke
court

25 approval of the supervisor upon finding, based on the
evidence,

26 that the supervisor has failed to protect the child or
is no

27 longer willing or capable of protecting the child.

28 (i) If the court finds that the parent has met the
burden of

29 rebutting the presumption under (g) of this subsection,
the court

30 may allow a parent residing with a person who has been
adjudicated

31 as a juvenile of a sex offense listed in (e)(i) through
(ix) of

32 this subsection to have visitation with the child in the
presence

33 of the person adjudicated as a juvenile, supervised by a
neutral

34 and independent adult and pursuant to an adequate plan
for

35 supervision of such visitation. The court shall not
approve of a

36 supervisor for contact between the child and the parent
unless the

37 court finds, based on the evidence, that the supervisor
is willing

38 and capable of protecting the child from harm. The
court shall

HB 2065 p. 10

_1 revoke court approval of the supervisor upon finding,
based on the

_2 evidence, that the supervisor has failed to protect the
child or

_3 is no longer willing or capable of protecting the child.

_4 (j) If the court finds that the parent has met the
burden of

_5 rebutting the presumption under (g) of this subsection,
the court

_6 may allow a parent residing with a person who, as an
adult, has

_7 been convicted of a sex offense listed in (e)(i) through
(ix) of

_8 this subsection to have visitation with the child in the
presence

_9 of the convicted person supervised by a neutral and
independent

10 adult and pursuant to an adequate plan for supervision
of such

11 visitation. The court shall not approve of a supervisor
for contact

12 between the child and the parent unless the court finds,
based on

13 the evidence, that the supervisor is willing and capable
of

14 protecting the child from harm. The court shall revoke
court

15 approval of the supervisor upon finding, based on the
evidence,

16 that the supervisor has failed to protect the child or
is no

17 longer willing or capable of protecting the child.

18 (k) A court shall not order unsupervised contact
between the

19 offending parent and a child of the offending parent who
was

20 sexually abused by that parent. A court may order
unsupervised

21 contact between the offending parent and a child who was
not

22 sexually abused by the parent after the presumption
under (d) of

23 this subsection has been rebutted and supervised
visitation has

24 occurred for at least two years with no further arrests
or

25 convictions of sex offenses involving children under
chapter 9A.44

26 RCW, RCW 9A.64.020, or chapter 9.68A RCW and (i) the sex
offense

27 of the offending parent was not committed against a
child of the

28 offending parent, and (ii) the court finds that
unsupervised

29 contact between the child and the offending parent is
appropriate

30 and poses minimal risk to the child, after consideration
of the

31 testimony of a state-certified therapist, mental health
counselor,

32 or social worker with expertise in treating child sexual
abuse

33 victims who has supervised at least one period of
visitation

34 between the parent and the child, and after
consideration of

35 evidence of the offending parent's compliance with
community

36 supervision requirements, if any. If the offending
parent was not

37 ordered by a court to participate in treatment for sex
offenders,

38 then the parent shall obtain a psychosexual evaluation
conducted

p. 11 HB
2065

_1 by a state-certified sex offender treatment provider
indicating

_2 that the offender has the lowest likelihood of risk to
reoffend

_3 before the court grants unsupervised contact between the
parent

_4 and a child.

_5 (l) A court may order unsupervised contact between
the parent

_6 and a child which may occur in the presence of a
juvenile

_7 adjudicated of a sex offense listed in (e)(i) through
(ix) of this

_8 subsection who resides with the parent after the
presumption under

_9 (e) of this subsection has been rebutted and supervised
visitation

10 has occurred for at least two years during which time
the

11 adjudicated juvenile has had no further arrests,
adjudications, or

12 convictions of sex offenses involving children under
chapter 9A.44

13 RCW, RCW 9A.64.020, or chapter 9.68A RCW, and (i) the
court finds

14 that unsupervised contact between the child and the
parent that

15 may occur in the presence of the adjudicated juvenile is

16 appropriate and poses minimal risk to the child, after

17 consideration of the testimony of a state-certified
therapist,

18 mental health counselor, or social worker with expertise
in

19 treatment of child sexual abuse victims who has
supervised at

20 least one period of visitation between the parent and
the child in

21 the presence of the adjudicated juvenile, and after
consideration

22 of evidence of the adjudicated juvenile's compliance
with

23 community supervision or parole requirements, if any.
If the

24 adjudicated juvenile was not ordered by a court to
participate in

25 treatment for sex offenders, then the adjudicated
juvenile shall

26 obtain a psychosexual evaluation conducted by a
state-certified

27 sex offender treatment provider indicating that the
adjudicated

28 juvenile has the lowest likelihood of risk to reoffend
before the

29 court grants unsupervised contact between the parent and
a child

30 which may occur in the presence of the adjudicated
juvenile who is

31 residing with the parent.

32 (m)(i) The limitations imposed by the court under
(a) or (b) of

33 this subsection shall be reasonably calculated to
protect the

34 child from the physical, sexual, or emotional abuse or
harm that

35 could result if the child has contact with the parent
requesting

36 visitation. If the court expressly finds based on the evidence
that

37 limitations on visitation with the child will not
adequately

38 protect the child from the harm or abuse that could
result if the

HB 2065 p. 12

_1 child has contact with the parent requesting visitation,
the court

_2 shall restrain the person seeking visitation from all
contact with

_3 the child.

_4 (ii) The court shall not enter an order under (a) of
this

_5 subsection allowing a parent to have contact with a
child if the

_6 parent has been found by clear and convincing evidence
in a civil

_7 action or by a preponderance of the evidence in a
dependency

_8 action to have sexually abused the child, except upon

_9 recommendation by an evaluator or therapist for the
child that the

10 child is ready for contact with the parent and will not
be harmed

11 by the contact. The court shall not enter an order
allowing a

12 parent to have contact with the child in the offender's
presence

13 if the parent resides with a person who has been found
by clear

14 and convincing evidence in a civil action or by a
preponderance of

15 the evidence in a dependency action to have sexually
abused a

16 child, unless the court finds that the parent accepts
that the

17 person engaged in the harmful conduct and the parent is
willing to

18 and capable of protecting the child from harm from the
person.

19 (iii) If the court limits visitation under (a) or
(b) of this

20 subsection to require supervised contact between the
child and the

21 parent, the court shall not approve of a supervisor for
contact

22 between a child and a parent who has engaged in
physical, sexual,

23 or a pattern of emotional abuse of the child unless the
court

24 finds based upon the evidence that the supervisor
accepts that the

25 harmful conduct occurred and is willing to and capable
of

26 protecting the child from harm. The court shall revoke
court

27 approval of the supervisor upon finding, based on the
evidence,

28 that the supervisor has failed to protect the child or
is no

29 longer willing to or capable of protecting the child.

30 (n) If the court expressly finds based on the
evidence that

31 contact between the parent and the child will not cause
physical,

32 sexual, or emotional abuse or harm to the child and that
the

33 probability that the parent's or other person's harmful
or abusive

34 conduct will recur is so remote that it would not be in
the

35 child's best interests to apply the limitations of (a),
(b), and

36 (m)(i) and (iii) of this subsection, or if the court
expressly

37 finds that the parent's conduct did not have an impact
on the

38 child, then the court need not apply the limitations of
(a), (b),

p. 13 HB
2065

_1 and (m)(i) and (iii) of this subsection. The weight
given to the

_2 existence of a protection order issued under chapter
26.50 RCW as

_3 to domestic violence is within the discretion of the
court. This

_4 subsection shall not apply when (c), (d), (e), (f), (g),
(h), (i),

_5 (j), (k), (l), and (m)(ii) of this subsection apply.

_6 (3) ((Any person may petition the court for
visitation rights

_7 at any time including, but not limited to, custody
proceedings.

_8 The court may order visitation rights for any person
when

_9 visitation may serve the best interest of the child
whether or not

10 there has been any change of circumstances.

11 (4))) The court may modify an order granting
or denying

12 visitation rights whenever modification would serve the
best

13 interests of the child. Modification of a parent's
visitation

14 rights shall be subject to the requirements of
subsection (2) of

15 this section.

16 (((5))) (4) For the purposes of this
section, a parent's child

17 means that parent's natural child, adopted child, or
stepchild.

18 NEW SECTION. Sec. 5. This act is necessary
for the immediate

19 preservation of the public peace, health, or safety, or
support of

20 the state government and its existing public
institutions, and

21 takes effect immediately.

‑‑‑ END ‑‑‑

HB 2065 p. 14