BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF
WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec.
1. The legislature finds
that good teachers are the cornerstone of the state's education system and that
preparing future teachers is critical to the well-being of the state. The
legislature finds that the state has a pool of excellent and experienced educators
who could be an invaluable resource to help beginning teachers weather their
difficult first years of teaching. Research indicates that providing mentors
for first year teachers results in an improved retention rate of those
teachers, therefore every beginning teacher should have an opportunity to work
with a trained peer mentor. Research also indicates that mentors must be
skilled and well-trained in order to effectively assist new teachers. The
legislature finds that matching excellent educators with new teachers and
teacher candidates will help school districts begin to develop additional
leadership and compensation opportunities for those exemplary teachers who act
as mentors for beginning teachers, teacher candidates, and other interested
colleagues. The legislature further finds that the existing beginning teacher
assistance program needs to be refocused to more effectively provide training
and peer mentors for new teachers.

The legislature intends
to refocus the beginning teacher assistance program and replace it with a peer
mentor program that emphasizes close working relationships between a beginning
teacher and an experienced peer mentor, frequent observations, the development
and implementation of professional development plans, the provision to
beginning teachers of assistance in devising strategies to raise student
achievement, and high-quality research-based training programs for peer
mentors.

In addition, an
essential component of teacher preparation is the opportunity for students in
teacher preparation programs to learn from experienced classroom teachers. The
legislature recognizes the importance of actual classroom experience in the
training of new teachers, and therefore intends to provide an incentive to
exceptional, experienced teachers to guide student teachers' classroom-based
student teaching experiences.

Sec. 2. RCW 28A.415.250 and 1993
c 336 s 401 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) The peer mentor
program is established. The purpose of the program is to nurture professional
growth and excellence in a beginning teacher through special training and
focused assistance provided by an experienced, trained, and excellent peer
mentor.

(2) To the extent
that funding is provided for this specific purpose, the superintendent of
public instruction shall ((adopt rules to establish and operate a teacher
assistance program. For the purposes of this section, the terms "mentor
teachers," "beginning teachers," and "experienced
teachers" may include any person possessing any one of the various
certificates issued by the superintendent of public instruction under RCW
28A.410.010. The program shall provide for:

(1) Assistance by
mentor teachers who will provide a source of continuing and sustained support
to beginning teachers, or experienced teachers who are having difficulties, or
both, both in and outside the classroom. A mentor teacher may not be involved
in evaluations under RCW 28A.405.100 of a teacher who receives assistance from
said mentor teacher under the teacher assistance program established under this
section. The mentor teachers shall also periodically inform their principals
respecting the contents of training sessions and other program activities;

(2) Stipends for
mentor teachers and beginning and experienced teachers which shall not be
deemed compensation for the purposes of salary lid compliance under RCW
28A.400.200: PROVIDED, That stipends shall not be subject to the continuing
contract provisions of this title;

(3) Workshops for
the training of mentor and beginning teachers;

(4) The use of
substitutes to give mentor teachers, beginning teachers, and experienced
teachers opportunities to jointly observe and evaluate teaching situations and
to give mentor teachers opportunities to observe and assist beginning and
experienced teachers in the classroom;

(5) Mentor teachers
who are superior teachers based on their evaluations, pursuant to RCW
28A.405.010 through 28A.405.240, and who hold valid continuing certificates;

(6) Mentor teachers
shall be selected by the district and may serve as mentors up to and including
full time. If a bargaining unit, certified pursuant to RCW 41.59.090 exists
within the district, classroom teachers representing the bargaining unit shall
participate in the mentor teacher selection process; and

(7) Periodic
consultation by the superintendent of public instruction or the
superintendent's designee with representatives of educational organizations and
associations, including educational service districts and public and private
institutions of higher education, for the purposes of improving communication
and cooperation and program review))
distribute funding to an eligible peer mentor program. An eligible peer
mentor program is a program that provides to a beginning teacher services that
include but need not be limited to:

(a) An orientation
process and individualized assistance to help a beginning teacher prepare for
the start of a school year;

(b) The assignment
of a peer mentor whose responsibilities to the beginning teacher include but
need not be limited to constructive feedback, the modeling of instructional
strategies, and frequent meetings and other forms of contact;

(c) The provision by
peer mentors of strategies, training, and guidance in critical areas such as
classroom management, student discipline, curriculum management, instructional
skill, assessment, communication skills, and professional conduct. A district
may provide these components through a variety of means including one-on-one
contact and workshops offered by peer mentors to groups, including cohort
groups, of beginning teachers;

(d) Since
observation is one of the critical tools that peer mentors need to use to help
assess a beginning teacher's professional development, the provision of release
time, substitutes, mentor training in observation techniques, and other
measures for both peer mentors and beginning teachers, to allow each an
adequate amount of time to observe the other and to provide the classroom
experience that each needs to work together effectively;

(e) Assistance in
the incorporation of the essential academic learning requirements into
instructional plans and in the development of complex teaching strategies,
including strategies to raise the achievement of students with diverse learning
styles and backgrounds;

(f) Guidance and
assistance in the development and implementation of a professional growth
plan. The plan shall include a professional self-evaluation component and one
or more informal performance assessments. A peer mentor may not be involved in
any evaluation under RCW 28A.405.100 of a beginning teacher whom the peer
mentor has assisted through this program.

(3) In addition to the
services provided in subsection (2) of this section, an eligible peer mentor
program shall include but need not be limited to the following components:

(a) Strong
collaboration among the peer mentor, the beginning teacher's principal, and the
beginning teacher; and

(b) Stipends for
peer mentors and, at the option of a district, for beginning teachers. The
stipends shall not be deemed compensation for the purposes of salary lid
compliance under RCW 28A.400.200 and are not subject to the continuing contract
provisions of this title.

(4) To the extent
that resources are available for this purpose and that assistance to beginning
teachers is not adversely impacted, the program may serve more experienced
teachers who request the assistance of peer mentors.

(5) To the extent
that funding is provided for this specific purpose, the superintendent of
public instruction shall operate a mentor academy to help districts provide
effective training for peer mentors. Districts are encouraged to include in
their programs academy training for peer mentors.

(6) To the maximum
extent possible, the superintendent shall simplify and minimize reporting
requirements for the peer mentor program. As part of the program, the
superintendent shall develop a system to track data on the teaching
assignments, retention, and mobility of beginning teachers and may conduct
surveys of participants to assess program effectiveness. Districts that are
participating in the peer mentor program shall provide such data to the
tracking system.

(7) By October 31st
of each even-numbered year, the superintendent of public instruction shall
report to the governor and the legislative education and fiscal committees on
the results of the data it has tracked, including an assessment of the peer
mentor program and its impacts on teacher recruitment, retention, and job
satisfaction. The reports may include additional information, including any
recommendations of the superintendent of public instruction for program
refinements.

(8) By December 1,
2001, districts shall incorporate into their state-funded assistance programs
for beginning teachers the requirements in subsection (2) of this section.
Until December 1, 2001, districts may receive state funds to assist beginning
teachers without meeting all the requirements of subsection (2) of this
section.

(9) The definitions
in this subsection apply throughout this section.

(a) "Peer
mentor" means an educator, including an individual in retirement status,
who in consultation with and with the approval of building principals who will
be working with the peer mentor, is selected by the district to serve in that
capacity up to and including full time, and who meets the following
qualifications:

(i) Possession of
one or more valid certificates issued by the superintendent of public
instruction under RCW 28A.410.010;

(ii) Possession of
five or more years of teaching experience;

(iii) Stature as an
excellent teacher as determined by the teacher's evaluations pursuant to RCW
28A.405.100 and criteria developed by the district in cooperation with the local
bargaining unit representing classroom teachers;

(iv) Experience,
skills, and interest in facilitating adult learning.

Classroom teachers,
representing the bargaining unit certified pursuant to RCW 41.59.090, in the
school where the mentor teacher will be assigned, shall participate in the peer
mentor selection process. Building principals shall consult with and obtain
recommendations from principals and classroom teachers who have had recent
experience working with peer mentor candidates. The principals shall also use
a collaborative process to recommend peer mentor candidates to the district.

(b) "Beginning
teacher" means a first or second year teacher who holds a valid residency,
provisional, or initial certificate issued by the superintendent of public
instruction under RCW 28A.410.010.

(c) "Mentor
academy" means a statewide training program for peer mentors organized and
coordinated by the superintendent of public instruction, in consultation with
the state board of education, the professional educator standards board, the
association of school principals, and other interested organizations.

(d)
"District" means a school district or educational service district.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
3. A new section is added
to chapter 28A.410 RCW to read as follows:

(1) "Cooperating
teacher" means a teacher who:

(a) Holds a continuing
or professional certificate and supervises and mentors a student teacher in a
public school;

(b) Is an excellent
teacher based on the teacher's evaluations pursuant to RCW 28A.405.100;

(c) Has at least four
school years of teaching experience; and

(d) Holds high
expectations for students and demonstrates the ability to help students achieve
at high levels and meet or exceed any academic standards adopted by the school
district and the state.

(2) "Student
teacher" means a candidate for initial or residency teacher certification
who is in a state board of education-approved teacher preparation program in a
public or private institution of higher education in Washington, and who is
student teaching in a public school.

(3) "Student
teaching" means a field experience lasting a minimum of approximately a
full academic quarter during which the student teacher participates in
instructional activities and assumes both part-time and full-time teaching
responsibilities under the supervision of the cooperating teacher. Student
teaching does not mean field experiences that are limited to opportunities for
observation, tutoring, microteaching, extended practicums, and clinical and
laboratory experiences that do not fall within the meaning of student teaching.

(4) If funding to pay
stipends to cooperating teachers is provided in the omnibus appropriations act,
the amount of the stipend shall be adjusted to conform with any budget proviso
and funding for the stipends shall be provided by the office of the superintendent
of public instruction to the school district that employs the cooperating
teacher or to the educational service district to which the district belongs,
as appropriate. The school district or educational service district shall pay
the full amount of the stipend to the cooperating teacher. Any funds provided
through the omnibus appropriations act for stipends shall supplement and not
supplant stipends and other forms of monetary assistance provided to
cooperating teachers during the previous academic year by institutions of
higher education with approved teacher preparation programs. The institution
of higher education shall use, at a minimum, the base year funding amounts to
directly support cooperating teachers. The support may include, in combination
or separately, higher stipends, material and supplies, and tuition assistance
or academic scholarships.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
4. If specific funding for
the purposes of section 2 of this act, referencing this act by bill or chapter
and section numbers, is not provided by June 30, 2001, in the omnibus
appropriations act, section 2 of this act is null and void.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 5. If specific funding for
the purposes of section 3 of this act, referencing this act by bill or chapter
and section numbers, is not provided by June 30, 2001, in the omnibus
appropriations act, section 3 of this act is null and void.

---
END ---