BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF
WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec.
1. The legislature finds
that, by law and rule, beginning with the class of 2008, students will be
required to pass the state high school assessment in a number of subjects
before they are permitted to graduate from public high schools. The
legislature also finds that this requirement will have a profound impact on the
lives of all students and on the adults who educate those students. Given that
profound impact, it is the responsibility of the legislature to determine when
passage of the high school assessment in each subject becomes a high school
graduation requirement. The legislature further finds that there is a need to
develop one or more rigorous, reliable, and valid alternative methods to
evaluate whether high school students have met the state's academic standards.

Therefore, the
legislature intends to clarify the dates by which passage of the Washington
assessment of student learning becomes required for high school graduation.
The legislature also intends to clarify the types of opportunities students
will have to retake the assessments. In addition, the legislature intends to
form an advisory committee that will recommend strategies to help all students
meet the state's high school graduation requirements. The legislature further
intends that the committee recommend one or more alternative methods to assess
whether high school students have achieved the state's essential academic learning
requirements.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
2. A new section is added
to chapter 28A.655 RCW to read as follows:

(1) By October 31,
2001, the office of the superintendent of public instruction shall convene an
advisory committee to review high school program and assessment options.

(2) The advisory
committee shall examine and make recommendations on the issues in this
subsection and such other related issues as the committee may identify:

(a) By October 31,
2001, incentives to encourage students to pass any required high school
assessments before the passage of the assessments become a statewide graduation
requirement. The incentives may not apply to home school students who enroll
in public schools in order to participate in running start opportunities
available through the school;

(b) Assessment and
meaningful educational program options for students who are able to pass any
required high school assessments during the tenth grade;

(c) Assistance and
meaningful educational program options for students who, through additional
time and effort, will likely pass the required assessments before the end of
high school;

(d) Processes through
which students, parents, and instructional staff can develop individual student
improvement plans for students who attempt, but do not pass, the required high
school assessments;

(e) Processes to
objectively identify, and meaningful educational options for, students who,
despite additional time and effort, are not likely to pass the high school assessments
before the students finish high school;

(f) By October 31,
2003, one or more alternative assessment methods that will permit high school
students to demonstrate that they have met state academic standards and the
essential academic learning requirements; and

(g) By October 31,
2006, a review and analysis of the requirement that students pass certain high
school assessments in order to graduate from a public high school.

(3) By October 31,
2003, and no later than October 31st of each year thereafter, the office of the
superintendent of public instruction shall provide to the house of
representatives and senate committees on education, a progress report on the
deliberations of the advisory committee. The report shall include the advisory
committee's findings and recommendations. Before any new policy recommended by
the advisory committee is implemented, the policy shall be submitted to the
education committees of the house of representatives and the senate for the
committees' review and comment.

(4) The advisory
committee shall include, but need not be limited to, representatives of
students, parents, educators, school directors, school administrators,
principals, community members, employers, employee organizations, the state
board of education, the higher education coordinating board, the state board
for community and technical colleges, the work force training and education
coordinating board, the academic achievement and accountability commission, and
the professional educators standards board. Advisory committee members shall
serve without additional compensation but are eligible for per diem and mileage
allowances under RCW 43.03.050 and 43.03.060.

Sec. 3. RCW 28A.655.060 and 1999
c 373 s 501 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) The Washington
commission on student learning is hereby established. The primary purposes of
the commission are to identify the knowledge and skills all public school
students need to know and be able to do based on the student learning goals in
RCW 28A.150.210, to develop student assessment and school accountability
systems, to review current school district data reporting requirements and make
recommendations on what data is necessary for the purposes of accountability
and meeting state information needs, and to take other steps necessary to
develop a performance-based education system. The commission shall include
three members of the state board of education, three members appointed by the
governor before July 1, 1992, and five members appointed no later than June 1,
1993, by the governor elected in the November 1992 election. The governor
shall appoint a chair from the commission members, and fill any vacancies in
gubernatorial appointments that may occur. The state board of education shall
fill any vacancies of state board of education appointments that may occur. In
making the appointments, educators, business leaders, and parents shall be
represented, and nominations from statewide education, business, and parent
organizations shall be requested. Efforts shall be made to ensure that the
commission reflects the racial and ethnic diversity of the state's K-12 student
population and that the major geographic regions in the state are represented.
Appointees shall be qualified individuals who are supportive of educational
restructuring, who have a positive record of service, and who will devote
sufficient time to the responsibilities of the commission to ensure that the
objectives of the commission are achieved.

(2) The commission
shall establish advisory committees. Membership of the advisory committees
shall include, but not necessarily be limited to, professionals from the office
of the superintendent of public instruction and the state board of education,
and other state and local educational practitioners and student assessment
specialists.

(3) The commission,
with the assistance of the advisory committees, shall((:

(a))) develop essential academic learning
requirements based on the student learning goals in RCW 28A.150.210. Essential
academic learning requirements shall be developed, to the extent possible, for
each of the student learning goals in RCW 28A.150.210. Goals one and two shall
be considered primary. Essential academic learning requirements for RCW
28A.150.210(1), goal one, and the mathematics component of RCW 28A.150.210(2),
goal two, shall be completed no later than March 1, 1995. Essential academic
learning requirements that incorporate the remainder of RCW 28A.150.210 (2),
(3), and (4), goals two, three, and four, shall be completed no later than
March 1, 1996. To the maximum extent possible, the commission shall integrate
goal four and the knowledge and skill areas in the other goals in the
development of the essential academic learning requirements((;)).

(((b)(i))) (4)(a)
The commission and superintendent of public instruction shall develop a
statewide academic assessment system for use in the elementary, middle, and
high school years designed to determine if each student has learned the
essential academic learning requirements identified in (((a) of this))
subsection (3) of this section. The academic assessment system shall
include a variety of assessment methods, including criterion-referenced and
performance-based measures. Performance standards for determining if a student
has successfully completed an assessment shall be determined by the commission
and the superintendent of public instruction in consultation with the advisory
committees required in subsection (2) of this section.

(((ii))) (b)
The assessment system shall be designed so that the results under the
assessment system are used by educators as tools to evaluate instructional
practices, and to initiate appropriate educational support for students who
have not learned the essential academic learning requirements at the
appropriate periods in the student's educational development.

(((iii))) (c)
Assessments measuring the essential academic learning requirements shall be
available for voluntary use by school districts and shall be required to be
administered by school districts according to the following schedule unless the
legislature takes action to delay or prevent implementation of the assessment
system and essential academic learning requirements.

Assessments Assessments

available
for required to be

voluntary
use administered

(School
years) (School years)

Reading, Writing,

Communication,
Mathematics

- Elementary school 1996-97 1997-98

- Middle school 1997-98 2000-01

- High school 1998-99 2000-01

Science

- Middle and high 1999-00 2000-01

school

- Elementary school 2001-02 2004-05

Social Studies

- Elementary, middle, 2002-03 2005-06

and high school

Arts

- Middle and high 2003-04 2006-07

school

- Elementary school 2003-04 2007-08

Health, Fitness

- Middle and high 2003-04 2006-07

school

- Elementary school 2003-04 2007-08

The completed
assessments and assessments still in development shall be transferred by the
commission on student learning to the superintendent of public instruction by
June 30, 1999.

(((iv))) (d)
To the maximum extent possible, the commission and the superintendent of public
instruction shall integrate knowledge and skill areas in development of the
assessments.

Assessments for goals
three and four of RCW 28A.150.210 shall be integrated in the essential academic
learning requirements and assessments for goals one and two.

(((v))) (e)
The commission on student learning may modify the essential academic learning
requirements and the assessments, as needed, before June 30, 1999. The
superintendent of public instruction may modify the essential academic learning
requirements and the assessments, as needed, after June 30, 1999. The
commission and superintendent shall, upon request, provide opportunities for
the education committees of the house of representatives and the senate to
review the assessments and proposed modifications to the essential academic
learning requirements before the modifications are adopted.

(((vi))) (f)
The commission and the superintendent of public instruction shall develop
assessments that are directly related to the essential academic learning
requirements, and are not biased toward persons with different learning styles,
racial or ethnic backgrounds, or on the basis of gender((;)).

(((c) After a
determination is made by the state board of education that the high school
assessment system has been implemented and that it is sufficiently reliable and
valid, successful completion of the high school assessment shall lead to a
certificate of mastery. The certificate of mastery shall be obtained)) (5)(a)
Beginning with the graduating class of 2008, passage of the high school reading
assessment shall be one of the requirements for graduation from a public high
school. Beginning with the graduating class of 2010, passage of the high
school writing and mathematics assessments shall be two of the conditions for
graduation from a public high school, if the state board of education has
determined that the assessments are technically valid and reliable.

(b) Passage of the
high school assessments should be achieved by most students at about the
age of sixteen, and is evidence that the students ((has)) have
successfully ((mastered)) demonstrated proficiency in the
essential academic learning requirements during ((his or her)) their
educational careers. ((The certificate of mastery)) Passage
of the high school assessments shall be required for graduation but shall
not be the only requirement for graduation. The date that each assessment
shall become a graduation requirement shall be determined by law. The
commission shall make recommendations to the state board of education regarding
the relationship between the certificate of mastery and high school graduation
requirements.

(c) Upon ((achieving
the certificate of mastery)) passage of required high school assessments,
schools shall provide students with the opportunity to pursue career and
educational objectives through educational pathways that emphasize integration
of academic and vocational education. Educational pathways may include, but
are not limited to, programs such as work-based learning, school-to-work
transition, tech prep, vocational-technical education, running start, and
preparation for technical college, community college, or university education.
Any middle school, junior high school, or high school using educational
pathways shall ensure that all participating students will continue to have
access to the courses and instruction necessary to meet admission requirements
at baccalaureate institutions. Students shall be allowed to enter the
educational pathway of their choice. Before accepting a student into an
educational pathway, the school shall inform the student's parent of the
pathway chosen, the opportunities available to the student through the pathway,
and the career objectives the student will have exposure to while pursuing the
pathway. Parents and students dissatisfied with the opportunities available
through the selected educational pathway shall be provided with the opportunity
to transfer the student to any other pathway provided in the school. Schools
may not develop educational pathways that retain students in high school beyond
the date they are eligible to graduate, and may not require students who
transfer between pathways to complete pathway requirements beyond the date the
student is eligible to graduate((;)).

(d) If a student
fails to meet the high school assessment standard in a content area required
for high school graduation, the student may retake the assessment at no cost to
the student. A student who meets the assessment standard in any content area
may retake the assessment once at student expense for the purpose of improving
the student's proficiency level. Any student who has met the standard but is
retaking the assessment to improve the student's proficiency level may not be
charged more than the cost of administering the assessment. Opportunities for
students to retake the assessments shall be provided at least once each year.

(e) School districts
shall designate on each student's official transcript whether the student
passed the required high school assessments and the highest score attained by
content area.

(f) As a local
option, school districts may establish requirements in addition to passage of
required high school assessments for high school graduation. The requirements
may include, but need not be limited to, community service, senior projects,
Carnegie units, student portfolios, and classroom-based assessments. However,
this subsection (5)(f) shall not be construed as modifying the requirements of
(a) and (b) of this subsection.

(g) The state board
of education shall not require students receiving private education under
chapter 28A.195 RCW or home-based instruction under chapter 28A.200 RCW to meet
the requirements for passage of the high school assessments or the essential
academic learning requirements.

(6) The commission,
with the assistance of advisory committees, shall:

(a) Consider
methods to address the unique needs of special education students when
developing the assessments in (((b) and (c) of this)) subsections (4)
and (5) of this section;

(((e))) (b)
Consider methods to address the unique needs of highly capable students when
developing the assessments in (((b) and (c) of this)) subsections (4)
and (5) of this section;

(((f))) (c)
Develop recommendations on the time, support, and resources, including
technical assistance, needed by schools and school districts to help students
achieve the essential academic learning requirements. These recommendations
shall include an estimate for the legislature, superintendent of public instruction,
and governor on the expected cost of implementing the academic assessment
system;

(((g))) (d)
Develop recommendations for consideration by the higher education coordinating
board for adopting college and university entrance requirements for public
school students that are consistent with the essential academic learning
requirements and ((the certificate of mastery)) passage of required
high school assessments;

(((h))) (e)
Review current school district data reporting requirements for the purposes of
accountability and meeting state information needs. The commission on student
learning shall report recommendations to the joint select committee on
education restructuring by September 15, 1996, on:

(i) What data is
necessary to compare how school districts are performing before the essential
academic learning requirements and the assessment system are implemented with
how school districts are performing after the essential academic learning
requirements and the assessment system are implemented; and

(ii) What data is
necessary pertaining to school district reports under the accountability
systems developed by the commission on student learning under this section;

(((i))) (f)
Recommend to the legislature, governor, state board of education, and superintendent
of public instruction:

(i) A statewide
accountability system to monitor and evaluate accurately and fairly at
elementary, middle, and high schools the level of learning occurring in
individual schools and school districts with regard to the goals included in
RCW 28A.150.210 (1) through (4). The accountability system must assess each
school individually against its own baseline, schools with similar
characteristics, and schools statewide. The system shall include school-site,
school district, and state-level accountability reports;

(ii) A school
assistance program to help schools and school districts that are having
difficulty helping students meet the essential academic learning requirements
as measured by performance on the elementary, middle school, and high school
assessments;

(iii) A system to
intervene in schools and school districts in which significant numbers of
students persistently fail to learn the essential academic learning
requirements or meet the standards established for the elementary, middle
school, and high school assessments; and

(iv) An awards program
to provide incentives to school staff to help their students learn the
essential academic learning requirements, with each school being assessed
individually against its own baseline, schools with similar characteristics,
and the statewide average. Incentives shall be based on the rate of percentage
change of students achieving the essential academic learning requirements and
progress on meeting the statewide average. School staff shall determine how
the awards will be spent.

The commission shall
make recommendations regarding a statewide accountability system for reading in
grades kindergarten through four by November 1, 1997. Recommendations for an
accountability system in the other subject areas and grade levels shall be made
no later than June 30, 1999;

(((j))) (g)
Report annually by December 1st to the legislature, the governor, the
superintendent of public instruction, and the state board of education on the
progress, findings, and recommendations of the commission; and

(((k))) (h)
Make recommendations to the legislature and take other actions necessary or
desirable to help students meet the student learning goals.

(((4))) (7)
The commission shall coordinate its activities with the state board of
education and the office of the superintendent of public instruction.

(((5))) (8)
The commission shall seek advice broadly from the public and all interested
educational organizations in the conduct of its work, including holding
periodic regional public hearings.

(((6))) (9)
The commission shall select an entity to provide staff support and the office
of the superintendent of public instruction shall provide administrative
oversight and be the fiscal agent for the commission. The commission may
direct the office of the superintendent of public instruction to enter into
subcontracts, within the commission's resources, with school districts,
teachers, higher education faculty, state agencies, business organizations, and
other individuals and organizations to assist the commission in its
deliberations.

(((7))) (10)
Members of the commission shall be reimbursed for travel expenses as provided
in RCW 43.03.050 and 43.03.060.

(((8))) (11)(a)
By September 30, 1997, the commission on student learning, the state board of
education, and the superintendent of public instruction shall jointly present
recommendations to the education committees of the house of representatives and
the senate regarding the high school assessments, the certificate of mastery,
and high school graduation requirements.

In preparing
recommendations, the commission on student learning shall convene an ad hoc
working group to address questions, including:

(i) What type of
document shall be used to identify student performance and achievement and how
will the document be described?

(ii) Should the
students be required to pass the high school assessments in all skill and
content areas, or only in select skill and content areas, to graduate?

(iii) How will the
criteria for establishing the standards for passing scores on the assessments
be determined?

(iv) What timeline
should be used in phasing-in the assessments as a graduation requirement?

(v) What options may be
used in demonstrating how the results of the assessments will be displayed in a
way that is meaningful to students, parents, institutions of higher education,
and potential employers?

(vi) Are there other or
additional methods by which the assessments could be used to identify
achievement such as endorsements, standards of proficiency, merit badges, or
levels of achievement?

(vii) Should the
assessments and certificate of mastery be used to satisfy college or university
entrance criteria for public school students? If yes, how should these methods
be phased-in?

(b) The ad hoc working
group shall report its recommendations to the commission on student learning,
the state board of education, and the superintendent of public instruction by
June 15, 1997. The commission shall report the ad hoc working group's
recommendations to the education committees of the house of representatives and
senate by July 15, 1997. Final recommendations of the commission on student
learning, the state board of education, and the superintendent of public
instruction shall be presented to the education committees of the house of
representatives and the senate by September 30, 1997.

(((9))) (12)
The Washington commission on student learning shall expire on June 30, 1999.

Sec. 4. RCW 28A.195.010 and 1993
c 336 s 1101 are each amended to read as follows:

The legislature hereby
recognizes that private schools should be subject only to those minimum state
controls necessary to insure the health and safety of all the students in the
state and to insure a sufficient basic education to meet usual graduation
requirements. However, the state board shall not require private school
students to meet the student learning goals, to take or pass the high school
assessment of student learning pursuant to RCW 28A.655.060, or to master the
essential academic learning requirements. However, private schools may choose,
on a voluntary basis, to have their students master the essential academic
learning requirements and take the Washington assessment of student learning.
The state, any agency or official thereof, shall not restrict or dictate any
specific educational or other programs for private schools except as
hereinafter in this section provided.

Principals of private
schools or superintendents of private school districts shall file each year
with the state superintendent of public instruction a statement certifying that
the minimum requirements hereinafter set forth are being met, noting any
deviations. After review of the statement, the state superintendent will
notify schools or school districts of those deviations which must be
corrected. In case of major deviations, the school or school district may
request and the state board of education may grant provisional status for one
year in order that the school or school district may take action to meet the
requirements. Minimum requirements shall be as follows:

(1) The minimum school
year for instructional purposes shall consist of no less than one hundred
eighty school days or the equivalent in annual minimum program hour offerings
as prescribed in RCW 28A.150.220.

(2) The school day
shall be the same as that required in RCW 28A.150.030 and 28A.150.220, except
that the percentages of total program hour offerings as prescribed in RCW
28A.150.220 for basic skills, work skills, and optional subjects and activities
shall not apply to private schools or private sectarian schools.

(3) All classroom
teachers shall hold appropriate Washington state certification except as
follows:

(a) Teachers for
religious courses or courses for which no counterpart exists in public schools
shall not be required to obtain a state certificate to teach those courses.

(b) In exceptional
cases, people of unusual competence but without certification may teach
students so long as a certified person exercises general supervision. Annual
written statements shall be submitted to the office of the superintendent of
public instruction reporting and explaining such circumstances.

(4) An approved private
school may operate an extension program for parents, guardians, or persons
having legal custody of a child to teach children in their custody. The
extension program shall require at a minimum that:

(a) The parent,
guardian, or custodian be under the supervision of an employee of the approved
private school who is certified under chapter 28A.410 RCW;

(b) The planning by the
certified person and the parent, guardian, or person having legal custody
include objectives consistent with this subsection and subsections (1), (2),
(5), (6), and (7) of this section;

(c) The certified
person spend a minimum average each month of one contact hour per week with
each student under his or her supervision who is enrolled in the approved
private school extension program;

(d) Each student's
progress be evaluated by the certified person; and

(e) The certified
employee shall not supervise more than thirty students enrolled in the approved
private school's extension program.

(5) Appropriate
measures shall be taken to safeguard all permanent records against loss or
damage.

(6) The physical
facilities of the school or district shall be adequate to meet the program
offered by the school or district: PROVIDED, That each school building shall
meet reasonable health and fire safety requirements. ((However, the state
board shall not require private school students to meet the student learning
goals, obtain a certificate of mastery to graduate from high school, to master
the essential academic learning requirements, or to be assessed pursuant to RCW
28A.630.885. However, private schools may choose, on a voluntary basis, to
have their students master these essential academic learning requirements, take
these assessments, and obtain certificates of mastery.)) A residential
dwelling of the parent, guardian, or custodian shall be deemed to be an
adequate physical facility when a parent, guardian, or person having legal
custody is instructing his or her child under subsection (4) of this section.

(7) Private school
curriculum shall include instruction of the basic skills of occupational
education, science, mathematics, language, social studies, history, health,
reading, writing, spelling, and the development of appreciation of art and
music, all in sufficient units for meeting state board of education graduation
requirements.

(8) Each school or
school district shall be required to maintain up-to-date policy statements
related to the administration and operation of the school or school district.

All decisions of
policy, philosophy, selection of books, teaching material, curriculum, except
as in subsection (7) above provided, school rules and administration, or other
matters not specifically referred to in this section, shall be the
responsibility of the administration and administrators of the particular
private school involved.

Sec. 5. RCW 28A.200.010 and 1995
c 52 s 1 are each amended to read as follows:

Each parent whose child
is receiving home-based instruction under RCW 28A.225.010(4) shall have the
duty to:

(1) File annually a
signed declaration of intent that he or she is planning to cause his or her
child to receive home-based instruction. The statement shall include the name
and age of the child, shall specify whether a certificated person will be
supervising the instruction, and shall be written in a format prescribed by the
superintendent of public instruction. Each parent shall file the statement by
September 15 of the school year or within two weeks of the beginning of any
public school quarter, trimester, or semester with the superintendent of the
public school district within which the parent resides or the district that
accepts the transfer, and the student shall be deemed a transfer student of the
nonresident district. Parents may apply for transfer under RCW 28A.225.220;

(2) Ensure that test
scores or annual academic progress assessments and immunization records,
together with any other records that are kept relating to the instructional and
educational activities provided, are forwarded to any other public or private
school to which the child transfers. At the time of a transfer to a public
school, the superintendent of the local school district in which the child
enrolls may require a standardized achievement test to be administered and
shall have the authority to determine the appropriate grade and course level
placement of the child after consultation with parents and review of the
child's records; and

(3) Ensure that a
standardized achievement test approved by the state board of education is
administered annually to the child by a qualified individual or that an annual
assessment of the student's academic progress is written by a certificated
person who is currently working in the field of education. The state board of
education shall not require these children to meet the student learning goals,
master the essential academic learning requirements, or to take or
pass the assessments((, or to obtain a certificate of mastery))
pursuant to RCW ((28A.630.885)) 28A.655.060. The standardized
test administered or the annual academic progress assessment written shall be
made a part of the child's permanent records. If, as a result of the annual
test or assessment, it is determined that the child is not making reasonable
progress consistent with his or her age or stage of development, the parent
shall make a good faith effort to remedy any deficiency.

Failure of a parent to
comply with the duties in this section shall be deemed a failure of such
parent's child to attend school without valid justification under RCW
28A.225.020. Parents who do comply with the duties set forth in this section
shall be presumed to be providing home-based instruction as set forth in RCW
28A.225.010(4).

Sec. 6. RCW 28B.80.350 and 1993
c 77 s 2 are each amended to read as follows:

The board shall
coordinate educational activities among all segments of higher education taking
into account the educational programs, facilities, and other resources of both
public and independent two and four-year colleges and universities. The
four-year institutions and the state board for community and technical colleges
shall coordinate information and activities with the board. The board shall
have the following additional responsibilities:

(1) Promote
interinstitutional cooperation;

(2) Establish minimum
admission standards for four-year institutions, including a requirement that
coursework in American sign language or an American Indian language shall
satisfy any requirement for instruction in a language other than English that
the board or the institutions may establish as a general undergraduate
admissions requirement. The board may not require students receiving a
private education under chapter 28A.195 RCW or home-based instruction under
chapter 28A.200 RCW to meet the essential academic learning requirements or to
take or pass the Washington assessment of student learning under RCW
28A.655.060;

(3) Establish transfer
policies;

(4) Adopt rules
implementing statutory residency requirements;

(5) Develop and
administer reciprocity agreements with bordering states and the province of
British Columbia;

(6) Review and
recommend compensation practices and levels for administrative employees,
exempt under chapter 28B.16 RCW, and faculty using comparative data from peer
institutions;

(7) Monitor higher
education activities for compliance with all relevant state policies for higher
education;

(8) Arbitrate disputes
between and among four-year institutions or between and among four-year
institutions and community colleges at the request of one or more of the
institutions involved, or at the request of the governor, or from a resolution
adopted by the legislature. The decision of the board shall be binding on the
participants in the dispute;

(9) Establish and
implement a state system for collecting, analyzing, and distributing
information;

(10) Recommend to the
governor and the legislature ways to remove any economic incentives to use
off-campus program funds for on-campus activities; and

(11) Make
recommendations to increase minority participation, and monitor and report on
the progress of minority participation in higher education.

Sec. 7. RCW 28B.20.130 and 1998
c 245 s 16 are each amended to read as follows:

General powers and
duties of the board of regents are as follows:

(1) To have full
control of the university and its property of various kinds, except as
otherwise provided by law.

(2) To employ the
president of the university, his or her assistants, members of the faculty, and
employees of the institution, who except as otherwise provided by law, shall
hold their positions during the pleasure of said board of regents.

(3) Establish entrance
requirements for students seeking admission to the university which meet or
exceed the standards specified under RCW 28B.80.350(2). Completion of
examinations satisfactory to the university may be a prerequisite for entrance
by any applicant at the university's discretion. Evidence of completion of
public high schools and other educational institutions whose courses of study
meet the approval of the university may be acceptable for entrance. The
board may not require students receiving a private education under chapter
28A.195 RCW or home-based instruction under chapter 28A.200 RCW to meet the
essential academic learning requirements or to take or pass the Washington
assessment of student learning under RCW 28A.655.060.

(4) Establish such
colleges, schools, or departments necessary to carry out the purpose of the
university and not otherwise proscribed by law.

(5) With the assistance
of the faculty of the university, prescribe the course of study in the various
colleges, schools, and departments of the institution and publish the necessary
catalogues thereof.

(6) Grant to students
such certificates or degrees as recommended for such students by the faculty.
The board, upon recommendation of the faculty, may also confer honorary degrees
upon persons other than graduates of this university in recognition of their
learning or devotion to literature, art, or science: PROVIDED, That no degree
shall ever be conferred in consideration of the payment of money or the giving
of property of whatsoever kind.

(7) Accept such gifts,
grants, conveyances, bequests, and devises, whether real or personal property,
or both, in trust or otherwise, for the use or benefit of the university, its
colleges, schools, departments, or agencies; and sell, lease or exchange,
invest or expend the same or the proceeds, rents, profits, and income thereof
except as limited by the terms of said gifts, grants, conveyances, bequests,
and devises. The board shall adopt proper rules to govern and protect the
receipt and expenditure of the proceeds of all fees, and the proceeds, rents,
profits, and income of all gifts, grants, conveyances, bequests, and devises ((above-mentioned))
in this subsection.

(8) Except as otherwise
provided by law, to enter into such contracts as the regents deem essential to
university purposes.

(9) To submit upon
request such reports as will be helpful to the governor and to the legislature
in providing for the institution.

(10) Subject to the
approval of the higher education coordinating board pursuant to RCW 28B.80.340,
offer new degree programs, offer off-campus programs, participate in consortia
or centers, contract for off-campus educational programs, and purchase or lease
major off-campus facilities.

Sec. 8. RCW 28B.30.150 and 1998
c 245 s 19 are each amended to read as follows:

The regents of
Washington State University, in addition to other duties prescribed by law,
shall:

(1) Have full control
of the university and its property of various kinds, except as otherwise
provided by law.

(2) Employ the
president of the university, his or her assistants, members of the faculty, and
employees of the university, who, except as otherwise provided by law, shall hold
their positions during the pleasure of said board of regents.

(3) Establish entrance
requirements for students seeking admission to the university which meet or
exceed the standards specified under RCW 28B.80.350(2). Completion of
examinations satisfactory to the university may be a prerequisite for entrance
by any applicant, at the university's discretion. Evidence of completion of
public high schools and other educational institutions whose courses of study
meet the approval of the university may be acceptable for entrance. The
board may not require students receiving a private education under chapter
28A.195 RCW or home-based instruction under chapter 28A.200 RCW to meet the
essential academic learning requirements or to take or pass the Washington
assessment of student learning under RCW 28A.655.060.

(4) Establish such
colleges, schools, or departments necessary to carry out the purpose of the
university and not otherwise proscribed by law.

(5) Subject to the
approval of the higher education coordinating board pursuant to RCW 28B.80.340,
offer new degree programs, offer off-campus programs, participate in consortia
or centers, contract for off-campus educational programs, and purchase or lease
major off-campus facilities.

(6) With the assistance
of the faculty of the university, prescribe the courses of instruction in the
various colleges, schools, and departments of the institution and publish the
necessary catalogues thereof.

(7) Collect such
information as the board deems desirable as to the schemes of technical
instruction adopted in other parts of the United States and foreign countries.

(8) Provide for holding
agricultural institutes including farm marketing forums.

(9) Provide that
instruction given in the university, as far as practicable, be conveyed by
means of laboratory work and provide in connection with the university one or
more physical, chemical, and biological laboratories, and suitably furnish and
equip the same.

(10) Provide training
in military tactics for those students electing to participate therein.

(11) Establish a
department of elementary science and in connection therewith provide
instruction in elementary mathematics, including elementary trigonometry,
elementary mechanics, elementary and mechanical drawing, and land surveying.

(12) Establish a
department of agriculture and in connection therewith provide instruction in
physics with special application of its principles to agriculture, chemistry
with special application of its principles to agriculture, morphology and
physiology of plants with special reference to common grown crops and fungus
enemies, morphology and physiology of the lower forms of animal life, with
special reference to insect pests, morphology and physiology of the higher
forms of animal life and in particular of the horse, cow, sheep, and swine,
agriculture with special reference to the breeding and feeding of livestock and
the best mode of cultivation of farm produce, and mining and metallurgy,
appointing demonstrators in each of these subjects to superintend the equipment
of a laboratory and to give practical instruction therein.

(13) Establish
agricultural experiment stations in connection with the department of
agriculture, including at least one in the western portion of the state, and
appoint the officers and prescribe regulations for their management.

(14) Grant to students
such certificates or degrees, as recommended for such students by the faculty.

(15) Confer honorary
degrees upon persons other than graduates of the university in recognition of
their learning or devotion to literature, art, or science when recommended
thereto by the faculty: PROVIDED, That no degree shall ever be conferred in
consideration of the payment of money or the giving of property of whatsoever
kind.

(16) Adopt plans and
specifications for university buildings and facilities or improvements thereto
and employ skilled architects and engineers to prepare such plans and
specifications and supervise the construction of buildings or facilities which
the board is authorized to erect, and fix the compensation for such services.
The board shall enter into contracts with one or more contractors for such
suitable buildings, facilities, or improvements as the available funds will
warrant, upon the most advantageous terms offered at a public competitive
letting, pursuant to public notice under rules established by the board. The
board shall require of all persons with whom they contract for construction and
improvements a good and sufficient bond for the faithful performance of the
work and full protection against all liens.

(17) Except as
otherwise provided by law, direct the disposition of all money appropriated to
or belonging to the state university.

(18) Receive and expend
the money appropriated under the act of congress approved May 8, 1914, entitled
"An Act to provide for cooperative agricultural extension work between the
agricultural colleges in the several States receiving the benefits of the Act
of Congress approved July 2, 1862, and Acts supplemental thereto and the United
States Department of Agriculture" and organize and conduct agricultural
extension work in connection with the state university in accordance with the
terms and conditions expressed in the acts of congress.

(19) Except as
otherwise provided by law, to enter into such contracts as the regents deem
essential to university purposes.

(20) Acquire by lease,
gift, or otherwise, lands necessary to further the work of the university or
for experimental or demonstrational purposes.

(21) Establish and
maintain at least one agricultural experiment station in an irrigation district
to conduct investigational work upon the principles and practices of
irrigational agriculture including the utilization of water and its relation to
soil types, crops, climatic conditions, ditch and drain construction, fertility
investigations, plant disease, insect pests, marketing, farm management,
utilization of fruit byproducts, and general development of agriculture under
irrigation conditions.

(22) Supervise and
control the agricultural experiment station at Puyallup.

(23) Establish and maintain
at Wenatchee an agricultural experiment substation for the purpose of
conducting investigational work upon the principles and practices of orchard
culture, spraying, fertilization, pollenization, new fruit varieties, fruit
diseases and pests, byproducts, marketing, management, and general
horticultural problems.

(24) Accept such gifts,
grants, conveyances, devises, and bequests, whether real or personal property,
in trust or otherwise, for the use or benefit of the university, its colleges,
schools, or departments; and sell, lease or exchange, invest or expend the same
or the proceeds, rents, profits, and income thereof except as limited by the
terms of said gifts, grants, conveyances, bequests, and devises; and adopt
proper rules to govern and protect the receipt and expenditure of the proceeds
of all fees, and the proceeds, rents, profits, and income of all gifts, grants,
conveyances, bequests, and devises.

(25) Construct when the
board so determines a new foundry and a mining, physical, technological
building, and fabrication shop at the university, or add to the present foundry
and other buildings, in order that both instruction and research be expanded to
include permanent molding and die casting with a section for new fabricating
techniques, especially for light metals, including magnesium and aluminum;
purchase equipment for the shops and laboratories in mechanical, electrical,
and civil engineering; establish a pilot plant for the extraction of alumina
from native clays and other possible light metal research; purchase equipment
for a research laboratory for technological research generally; and purchase
equipment for research in electronics, instrumentation, energy sources,
plastics, food technology, mechanics of materials, hydraulics, and similar
fields.

(26) Make and transmit
to the governor and members of the legislature upon request such reports as
will be helpful in providing for the institution.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
9. A new section is added
to chapter 28B.35 RCW to read as follows:

The board of trustees
may not require students receiving a private education under chapter 28A.195
RCW or home-based instruction under chapter 28A.200 RCW to meet the essential
academic learning requirements or to take or pass the Washington assessment of
student learning under RCW 28A.655.060 as a condition of meeting minimum
college admission standards.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
10. A new section is added
to chapter 28B.40 RCW to read as follows:

The board
of trustees may not require students receiving a private education under
chapter 28A.195 RCW or home-based instruction under chapter 28A.200 RCW to meet
the essential academic learning requirements or to take or pass the Washington
assessment of student learning under RCW 28A.655.060 as a condition of meeting
minimum college admission standards.

---
END ---