BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF
WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1. RCW 82.08.840 and 2000 c
40 s 2 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) The tax levied by
RCW 82.08.020 does not apply to sales of machinery and equipment, and to
services rendered in respect to constructing structures, installing,
constructing, repairing, cleaning, decorating, altering, or improving of
structures or eligible machinery and equipment, or to sales of tangible
personal property that becomes an ingredient or component of eligible
structures or eligible machinery and equipment, if the machinery, equipment, or
structure is used more than half of the time:

(a) For gathering,
densifying, processing, handling, storing, transporting, or incorporating straw
or straw-based products that results in a reduction in field burning of cereal
grains and field and turf grass grown for seed; ((or))

(b) For gathering,
transporting, chipping, grinding, composting, and incorporating orchard
trimmings and takeouts, and other agricultural debris in lieu of burning; or

(c) To decrease
air emissions resulting from field burning of cereal grains and field and turf
grass grown for seed or from burning orchard prunings and takeouts or other
agricultural debris.

(2) A person taking the
exemption under this section must keep records necessary for the department to
verify eligibility under this section. The exemption is available only when
the buyer provides the seller with an exemption certificate in a form and
manner prescribed by the department. The seller shall retain a copy of the
certificate for the seller's files.

(3) The department of
ecology and the department of agriculture shall consult with the department
with regard to the information necessary for the department to administer this
section.

(((4) This section
expires January 1, 2006.))

Sec. 2. RCW 82.12.840 and 2000 c
40 s 3 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) The provisions of
this chapter do not apply in respect to the use of machinery and equipment, or
tangible personal property that becomes an ingredient or component of eligible
machinery and equipment used more than half of the time:

(a) For gathering,
densifying, processing, handling, storing, transporting, or incorporating straw
or straw-based products that will result in a reduction in field burning of
cereal grains and field and turf grass grown for seed; ((or))

(b) For gathering,
transporting, chipping, grinding, composting, and incorporating orchard
trimmings and takeouts, and other agricultural debris in lieu of burning; or

(c) To decrease
air emissions resulting from field burning of cereal grains and field and turf
grass grown for seed or from burning orchard prunings and takeouts or other
agricultural debris.

(2) A person taking the
exemption under this section must keep records necessary for the department to
verify eligibility under this section.

(3) The department of
ecology shall provide the department with the information necessary for the
department to administer this section.

(((4) This section
expires January 1, 2006.))

Sec. 3. RCW 82.04.4459 and 2000
c 40 s 4 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) A person who is
eligible for the exemption under RCW 82.08.840 or 82.12.840 may take a credit
against tax imposed by this chapter, subject to the limitations in this
section.

(2) The credit under
this section is equal to fifty percent of the amount of costs expended for
constructing structures or acquiring machinery and equipment for which an
exemption was taken under RCW 82.08.840 or 82.12.840.

(3) No application is
necessary for the credit under this section. A person taking the credit must
keep records necessary for the department to verify eligibility under this
section. Tax credit may not be claimed for expenditures that occurred before
March 22, 2000.

(4) No applicant is
eligible for tax credits under this section in excess of the amount of tax that
would otherwise be due under this chapter. Approved credit may not be carried
over to subsequent calendar years. The credit must be claimed by the due date
of the last tax return for the calendar year in which the payment is made. Any
unused credit expires. Refunds shall not be given in place of credits.

(((5) This section
expires January 1, 2006.))

Sec. 4. RCW 84.36.580 and 2000 c
40 s 5 are each amended to read as follows:

Personal property
eligible for exemption under RCW 82.08.840 or 82.12.840 is exempt from
taxation.

((This
section applies to taxes levied for collection in 2001 through 2006. This
section expires January 1, 2007.))

---
END ---