BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF
WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1. RCW 4.56.115 and 1983 c
147 s 2 are each amended to read as follows:

Judgments founded on
the tortious conduct of the state of Washington or of the political
subdivisions, municipal corporations, and quasi municipal corporations of the
state, whether acting in their governmental or proprietary capacities, shall
bear interest from the date of entry at two percentage points above the
((maximum rate permitted under RCW 19.52.020 on)) equivalent coupon
issue yield (as published by the board of governors of the federal reserve
system) of the average bill rate for twenty-six week treasury bills as
determined at the first bill market auction conducted during the calendar month
immediately preceding the date of entry thereof((: PROVIDED, That)).
In any case where a court is directed on review to enter judgment on a
verdict or in any case where a judgment entered on a verdict is wholly or
partly affirmed on review, interest on the judgment or on that portion of the
judgment affirmed shall date back to and shall accrue from the date the verdict
was rendered.

Sec. 2. RCW 4.56.110 and 1989 c
360 s 19 are each amended to read as follows:

Interest on judgments
shall accrue as follows:

(1) Judgments founded
on written contracts, providing for the payment of interest until paid at a
specified rate, shall bear interest at the rate specified in the contracts:
PROVIDED, That said interest rate is set forth in the judgment.

(2) All judgments for
unpaid child support that have accrued under a superior court order or an order
entered under the administrative procedure act shall bear interest at the rate
of twelve percent.

(3) Except
as provided under subsections (1) and (2) of this section, judgments shall bear
interest from the date of entry at two percentage points above the ((maximum
rate permitted under RCW 19.52.020 on)) equivalent coupon issue yield
(as published by the board of governors of the federal reserve system) of the
average bill rate for twenty-six week treasury bills as determined at the first
bill market auction conducted during the calendar month immediately preceding
the date of entry thereof((: PROVIDED, That)). In any case
where a court is directed on review to enter judgment on a verdict or in any
case where a judgment entered on a verdict is wholly or partly affirmed on
review, interest on the judgment or on that portion of the judgment affirmed
shall date back to and shall accrue from the date the verdict was rendered.

---
END ---