BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF
WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec.
1. The purpose of this
chapter is to provide legal recognition to the professions of industrial
hygiene and safety, as well as to provide assurance to the public that
individuals representing themselves as being involved in the professions of
industrial hygiene and safety have met minimum qualifications, thereby
protecting the public from harm.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
2. The definitions in this
section apply throughout this chapter unless the context clearly requires
otherwise.

(1) "Associate
safety professional" means a person who has received, and is currently
authorized to use the designation of associate safety professional from the
board of certified safety professionals, a national nonprofit corporation
established to improve the practice and educational standards of the profession
of safety and that certifies individuals who meet its education, experience,
examination, and maintenance requirements for practicing safety.

(2) "Certified
industrial hygienist" means a person who has received, and is currently
authorized to use, the designation of certified industrial hygienist from the
American board of industrial hygiene, a national nonprofit corporation
established to improve the practice and educational standards of the profession
of industrial hygiene and that certifies individuals who meet its education,
experience, examination, and maintenance requirements for practicing
industrial hygiene.

(3) "Certified
safety professional" means a person who has received, and is currently
authorized to use, the designation of certified safety professional from the
board of certified safety professionals, a national nonprofit corporation
established to improve the practice and educational standards of the profession
of safety and that certifies individuals who meet its education, experience,
examination, and maintenance requirements for practicing safety.

(4) "Industrial
hygiene" means that science and art devoted to the anticipation,
recognition, evaluation, and control of those environmental factors and
stresses arising in or from the workplace that may cause sickness, impaired
health and well-being, or significant discomfort among workers, and may also
impact the general community.

(5) "Industrial
hygienist" means a person who meets the educational requirements and who
demonstrates competence in practicing industrial hygiene as determined under
this chapter.

(6) "Industrial
hygienist-in-training" means a person who has received, and is currently
authorized to use, the designation of industrial hygienist-in-training from the
American board of industrial hygiene, a national nonprofit corporation
established to improve the practice and educational standards of the profession
of industrial hygiene and that certifies individuals who meet its education,
experience, examination, and maintenance requirements for practicing industrial
hygiene.

(7) "Safety"
means that art and science devoted to the protection of people, property, and
the environment through anticipation, identification, and evaluation of
hazardous conditions and practices; in order to develop hazard control designs,
methods, procedures, and programs; to implement, administer, and advise others
of hazard control programs; and to measure, audit, and evaluate the
effectiveness of hazard control programs.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
3. (1) No person may
represent himself or herself as an industrial hygienist without first:

(a) Completing a
baccalaureate or graduate degree from an accredited college or university using
a curriculum in industrial hygiene, biology, chemistry, engineering, physics,
or a closely related physical or biological science; and

(b) Demonstrating,
through experience and training, the ability:

(i) To anticipate and
recognize workplace environmental factors and stresses such as chemical,
physical, biological, or ergonomic, and to understand their effects on people
and their well-being;

(ii) To evaluate,
through observation, sampling, and testing, the magnitude of these factors and
stresses; and

(iii) To prescribe
methods to prevent, eliminate, control, or reduce such factors and stresses and
their effects; or

(c) Being certified by
a national nonprofit corporation established to improve the practice and
educational standards of the profession of industrial hygiene and that
certifies individuals who meet its education, experience, examination, and
maintenance requirements.

(2) A person represents
himself or herself as an industrial hygienist when the person adopts or uses
any title or description of services that incorporates one or more of the
following terms: Industrial hygienist, industrial hygienist-in-training
(IHIT), or certified industrial hygienist (CIH).

(3) No person may
represent himself or herself as a certified industrial hygienist without first
being certified by and currently authorized to use the title by a national
nonprofit corporation. The national nonprofit corporation must be established
to improve the practice and educational standards of the profession of
industrial hygiene, and certify individuals as certified industrial hygienists
when they meet its education, experience, examination, and maintenance
requirements.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
4. (1) No person may
represent himself or herself as an associate safety professional unless they
meet the qualifications defined in section 2(1) of this act.

(2) No person may
represent himself or herself as a certified safety professional unless they
meet the qualifications defined in section 2(3) of this act.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
5. (1) A person meeting the
requirements of section 3 of this act or a nonprofit corporation established to
improve the practice and educational standards of the profession of industrial
hygiene through certifying individuals who meet its education, experience,
examination, and maintenance requirements may bring a private cause of action
in a court of competent jurisdiction to recover actual damages or one thousand
dollars, whichever is greater, against any person who violates section 3 of
this act.

(2) A person meeting
the requirements of section 4 of this act or a nonprofit corporation
established to improve the practice and educational standards of the profession
of safety through certifying individuals who meet its education, experience,
examination, and maintenance requirements may bring a private cause of action
in a court of competent jurisdiction to recover actual damages or one thousand
dollars, whichever is greater, against any person who violates section 4 of
this act.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
6. Nothing in this chapter
prohibits or restricts:

(1) The practice of
industrial hygiene by a person employed as an apprentice under the supervision
of an industrial hygienist;

(2) A student studying
industrial hygiene engaging in supervised activities related to industrial
hygiene;

(3) A student studying
safety engaging in supervised activities related to safety;

(4) Any person legally
regulated in this state under any other licensing act or regulation from
engaging in the activities permitted under his or her license, provided he or
she does not represent himself or herself to the public as an industrial
hygienist;

(5) Individuals
practicing within the scope of the meaning of industrial hygiene, so long as
the individual does not use the title, initials, or represent themselves to the
public as an industrial hygienist; or

(6) Individuals
practicing within the scope of the meaning of safety, so long as the individual
does not use the title, initials, or represent themselves to the public as an
associate or certified safety professional.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 7. Sections 1 through 6 of
this act constitute a new chapter in Title 18 RCW.

---
END ---