BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF
WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1. RCW 43.332.005 and 1995
c 350 s 1 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) The legislature
finds that:

(a) The expansion of
international trade is vital to the overall growth of Washington's economy;

(b) On a per capita basis,
Washington state is the most international trade dependent state in the nation;

(c) The North American
free trade agreement (NAFTA) and the general agreement on tariffs and trade
(GATT) highlight the increased importance of international trade opportunities
to the United States and the state of Washington;

(d) The passage of
NAFTA and GATT will have a major impact on the state's agriculture, aerospace,
computer software, and textiles and apparel sectors;

(e) There is a need to
strengthen and coordinate the state's activities in promoting and developing
its agricultural, manufacturing, and service industries overseas, especially
for small and medium-sized businesses, and minority and women-owned business
enterprises; and

(f) The importance of
having a coherent vision for advancing Washington state's interest in the
global economy has rarely been so consequential as it is now.

(2) The legislature
declares that the purpose of the office of the Washington state trade
representative is to:

(a) Strengthen
and expand the state's activities in marketing its goods and services overseas;
and

(b) Review and
analyze proposed international trade agreements to assess their impact on goods
and services produced by Washington businesses.

Sec. 2. RCW 43.332.010 and 1995
c 350 s 2 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) The office
of the Washington state trade representative is created ((under)) in
the office of the governor. The office shall serve as the state's official
liaison with foreign governments on trade matters.

((The office of the
Washington state trade representative may accept or request grants or gifts
from citizens and other private sources to be used to defray the costs of
appropriate hosting of foreign dignitaries, including appropriate gift-giving
and reciprocal gift-giving, or other activities of the office. The office
shall open and maintain a bank account into which it shall deposit all money
received under this section. Such money and the interest accruing thereon
shall not constitute public funds, shall be kept segregated and apart from
funds of the state, and shall not be subject to appropriation or allotment by
the state or subject to chapter 43.88 RCW.)) (2) The office shall:

(a) Review and
analyze proposed and enacted international trade agreements and provide an
assessment of the impact of the proposed or enacted agreement on Washington's
businesses and firms;

(b) Provide input to
the office of the United States trade representative in the development of international
trade, commodity, and direct investment policies that reflect the concerns of
the state of Washington;

(c) Work with the
international trade division of the department of community, trade, and
economic development and the international marketing program of the Washington
state department of agriculture to develop a statewide strategy designed to
increase the export of Washington goods and services, particularly goods and
services from small and medium-sized businesses; and

(d) Conduct other
activities the governor deems necessary to promote international trade and
foreign investment within the state.

(3) The office shall
prepare and submit an annual report on its activities under subsection (2) of
this section to the governor and appropriate committees of the legislature.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
3. A new section is added
to chapter 43.332 RCW to read as follows:

The office
of the Washington state trade representative may accept or request grants or
gifts from citizens and other private sources to be used to defray the costs of
appropriate hosting of foreign dignitaries, including appropriate gift-giving
and reciprocal gift-giving, or other activities of the office. The office
shall open and maintain a bank account into which it shall deposit all money
received under this section. Such money and the interest accruing thereon
shall not constitute public funds, shall be kept segregated and apart from
funds of the state, and shall not be subject to appropriation or allotment by
the state or subject to chapter 43.88 RCW.

---
END ---