BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF
WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec.
1. A new section is added
to chapter 5.60 RCW to read as follows:

(1) An out-of-court
statement, not otherwise admissible by statute or court rule, made by a person
describing an assault, or neglect of the declarant, when the act results in the
death of or substantial bodily harm to the declarant, as defined in RCW
9A.04.110, or any sex offense is admissible as evidence in a civil, criminal,
or juvenile offense adjudication proceeding if the court finds:

(a) That the declarant,
at the time the out-of-court statement was made, was otherwise qualified to be
a witness under RCW 5.60.020;

(b) The declarant is
not qualified to be a witness under RCW 5.60.050 or is no longer alive at the
time of his or her production for examination;

(c) There is
corroborative evidence of the act against the declarant; and

(d) In a hearing
conducted outside the presence of the jury, if any, that the time, content, and
circumstances of the out-of-court statement provide sufficient indicia of
reliability. In making its determination, the court shall consider whether, at
the time the statement was made, the reliability of the declaration was
indicated by:

(i) The general
character and trustworthiness of the declarant;

(ii) The timing of the
declaration;

(iii) The declarant's
lack of motive to lie;

(iv) The relationship
of the declarant to the witness;

(v) Whether the
declarant made the statement to more than one person;

(vi) The mental and
physical condition and cognitive ability of the declarant;

(vii) Whether the
statement was made spontaneously;

(viii) Whether the
statement expressed assertions of past fact;

(ix) Whether
cross-examination would not have helped to show the declarant's lack of
knowledge;

(x) Whether the
possibility of the declarant's recollection being faulty was remote;

(xi) Whether the
circumstances surrounding the statements gave no reason to suppose that the
declarant misrepresented the actor's involvement;

(xii) The relationship
of the declarant to the actor;

(xiii) The nature and
duration of the sexual abuse, assault, or neglect; and

(xiv) Any other factor
deemed appropriate.

(2) A
statement may not be admitted under this section unless the proponent of the
statement gives notice to the adverse party of his or her intention to offer
the statement and the particulars of the statement sufficiently in advance of
the proceedings to provide the adverse party with a fair opportunity to
challenge the admissibility of the statement at a hearing. The court shall
state the basis for its ruling by making specific findings of fact on the
record.

--- END ---