BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF
WASHINGTON:

_4 Sec. 1. RCW
90.03.383 and 1991 c 350 s 1 are each amended to read

_5 as follows:

_6 (1) The legislature recognizes the value of
interties for

_7 improving the reliability of public water systems,
enhancing their

_8 management, and more efficiently utilizing the
increasingly

_9 limited resource. Given the continued growth in the
most populous

10 areas of the state, the increased complexity of public
water

11 supply management, and the trend toward regional
planning and

12 regional solutions to resource issues, interconnections
of public

13 water systems through interties provide a valuable tool
to ensure

14 reliable public water supplies for the citizens of the
state.

15 Public water systems have been encouraged in the past to
utilize

16 interties to achieve public health and resource
management

17 objectives. The legislature finds that it is in the
public interest

18 to recognize interties existing and in use as of January
1, 1991,

p. 1 HB
2078

_1 and to have associated water rights modified by the
department of

_2 ecology to reflect current use of water through those
interties,

_3 pursuant to subsection (3) of this section. The
legislature further

_4 finds it in the public interest to develop a coordinated
process

_5 to review proposals for interties commencing use after
January 1,

_6 1991.

_7 (2) For the purposes of this section, the following
definitions

_8 shall apply:

_9 (a) "Interties" are interconnections
between public water

10 systems permitting exchange or delivery of water between
those

11 systems for other than emergency supply purposes, where
such

12 exchange or delivery is within established instantaneous
and

13 annual withdrawal rates specified in the systems'
existing water

14 right permits or certificates, or contained in claims
filed

15 pursuant to chapter 90.14 RCW, and which results in
better

16 management of public water supply consistent with
existing rights

17 and obligations. Interties include interconnections
between public

18 water systems permitting exchange or delivery of water
to serve as

19 primary or secondary sources of supply((, but do not
include

20 development of new sources of supply to meet future
demand)).

21 (b) "Service area" is the area designated
in a water system

22 plan or a coordinated water system plan pursuant to
chapter 43.20

23 or 70.116 RCW respectively. When a public water system
does not

24 have a designated service area subject to the approval
process of

25 those chapters, the service area shall be the designated
place of

26 use contained in the water right permit or certificate,
or

27 contained in the claim filed pursuant to chapter 90.14
RCW.

28 (3) Public water systems with interties existing and
in use as

29 of January 1, 1991, or that have received written
approval from

30 the department of health prior to that date, shall file
written

31 notice of those interties with the department of health
and the

32 department of ecology. The notice may be incorporated
into the

33 public water system's five-year update of its water
system plan,

34 but shall be filed no later than June 30, 1996. The notice
shall

35 identify the location of the intertie; the dates of its
first use;

36 the purpose, capacity, and current use; the intertie
agreement of

37 the parties and the service areas assigned; and other
information

38 reasonably necessary to modify the water right permit.

HB 2078 p. 2

_1 Notwithstanding the provisions of RCW 90.03.380 and
90.44.100, for

_2 public water systems with interties existing and in use
as of

_3 January 1, 1991, the department of ecology, upon receipt
of notice

_4 meeting the requirements of this subsection, shall, as
soon as

_5 practicable, modify the place of use descriptions in the
water

_6 right permits, certificates, or claims to reflect the
actual use

_7 through such interties, provided that the place of use
is within

_8 service area designations established in a water system
plan

_9 approved pursuant to chapter 43.20 RCW, or a coordinated
water

10 system plan approved pursuant to chapter 70.116 RCW, and
further

11 provided that the water used is within the instantaneous
and

12 annual withdrawal rates specified in the water right
permit and

13 that no outstanding complaints of impairment to existing
water

14 rights have been filed with the department of ecology
prior to

15 September 1, 1991. Where such complaints of impairment
have been

16 received, the department of ecology shall make all
reasonable

17 efforts to resolve them in a timely manner through
agreement of

18 the parties or through available administrative
remedies.

19 (4) Notwithstanding the provisions of RCW 90.03.380
and

20 90.44.100, exchange or delivery of water through
interties

21 commencing use after January 1, 1991, shall be permitted
when the

22 intertie improves overall system reliability, enhances
the

23 manageability of the systems, provides opportunities for

24 conjunctive use, or delays or avoids the need to develop
new water

25 sources, and otherwise meets the requirements of this
section,

26 provided that each public water system's water use shall
not

27 exceed the instantaneous or annual withdrawal rate
specified in

28 its water right authorization, shall not adversely
affect existing

29 water rights, and shall not be inconsistent with
state-approved

30 plans such as water system plans or other plans which
include

31 specific proposals for construction of interties.
Interties

32 commencing use after January 1, 1991, shall not be
inconsistent

33 with regional water resource plans developed pursuant to
chapter

34 90.54 RCW.

35 (5) For public water systems subject to the approval
process of

36 chapter 43.20 RCW or chapter 70.116 RCW, proposals for
interties

37 commencing use after January 1, 1991, shall be
incorporated into

38 water system plans pursuant to chapter 43.20 RCW or
coordinated

p. 3 HB
2078

_1 water system plans pursuant to chapter 70.116 RCW and
submitted to

_2 the department of health and the department of ecology
for review

_3 and approval as provided for in subsections (5) through
(9) of

_4 this section. The plan shall state how the proposed
intertie will

_5 improve overall system reliability, enhance the
manageability of

_6 the systems, provide opportunities for conjunctive use,
or delay

_7 or avoid the need to develop new water sources.

_8 (6) The department of health shall be responsible
for review

_9 and approval of proposals for new interties. In its
review the

10 department of health shall determine whether the
intertie

11 satisfies the criteria of subsection (4) of this
section, with the

12 exception of water rights considerations, which are the

13 responsibility of the department of ecology, and shall
determine

14 whether the intertie is necessary to address emergent
public

15 health or safety concerns associated with public water
supply.

16 (7) If the intertie is determined by the department
of health

17 to be necessary to address emergent public health or
safety

18 concerns associated with public water supply, the public
water

19 system shall amend its water system plan as required and
shall

20 file an application with the department of ecology to
change its

21 existing water right to reflect the proposed use of the
water as

22 described in the approved water system plan. The
department of

23 ecology shall process the application for change
pursuant to RCW

24 90.03.380 or 90.44.100 as appropriate, except that,

25 notwithstanding the requirements of those sections
regarding

26 notice and protest periods, applicants shall be required
to

27 publish notice one time, and the comment period shall be
fifteen

28 days from the date of publication of the notice. Within
sixty days

29 of receiving the application, the department of ecology
shall

30 issue findings and advise the department of health if
existing

31 water rights are determined to be adversely affected.
If no

32 determination is provided by the department of ecology
within the

33 sixty-day period, the department of health shall proceed
as if

34 existing rights are not adversely affected by the
proposed

35 intertie. The department of ecology may obtain an
extension of the

36 sixty-day period by submitting written notice to the
department of

37 health and to the applicant indicating a definite date
by which

HB 2078 p. 4

_1 its determination will be made. No additional
extensions shall be

_2 granted, and in no event shall the total review period
for the

_3 department of ecology exceed one hundred eighty days.

_4 (8) If the department of health determines the
proposed

_5 intertie appears to meet the requirements of subsection
(4) of

_6 this section but is not necessary to address emergent
public

_7 health or safety concerns associated with public water
supply, the

_8 department of health shall instruct the applicant to submit
to the

_9 department of ecology an application for change to the
underlying

10 water right or claim as necessary to reflect the new
place of

11 use. The department of ecology shall consider the
applications

12 pursuant to the provisions of RCW 90.03.380 and
90.44.100 as

13 appropriate. If in its review of proposed interties and
associated

14 water rights the department of ecology determines that
additional

15 information is required to act on the application, the
department

16 may request applicants to provide information necessary
for its

17 decision, consistent with agency rules and written

18 guidelines. Parties disagreeing with the decision of
the department

19 of ecology on the application for change in place of use
may

20 appeal the decision to the pollution control hearings
board.

21 (9) The department of health may approve plans
containing

22 intertie proposals prior to the department of ecology's
decision

23 on the water right application for change in place of
use.

24 However, notwithstanding such approval, construction
work on the

25 intertie shall not begin until the department of ecology
issues

26 the appropriate water right document to the applicant
consistent

27 with the approved plan.

‑‑‑ END ‑‑‑

p. 5 HB
2078