BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF
WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1. RCW 18.34.020 and 1995 c
178 s 1 are each amended to read as follows:

The term
"secretary" wherever used in this chapter ((shall)) means
the secretary of health of the state of Washington. The term
"apprentice" wherever used in this chapter ((shall)) means
a person who ((shall be)) is designated an apprentice in the
records of the secretary at the request of a physician, registered optometrist,
or licensee hereunder, who shall thereafter be the primary supervisor of the
apprentice. The apprentice may thereafter receive from a physician, registered
optometrist, or licensee hereunder training and direct supervision in the work
of a dispensing optician. The term "refracting" whenever used in
this chapter means the measurement of the powers or range of a person's vision
by the use of a series of lenses and their rotation to determine the degree of
correction needed to compensate for hyperopia, myopia, presbyopia, astigmatism,
prism, or any combination of these. "Prescription modification"
whenever used in this chapter, means the ability of a licensed refracting
optician to alter a prescription within a cumulative plus or minus 2.00 diopter
of change provided that there is no more than plus or minus 1.00 diopter of
change at any one time during a six-month period. A licensed refracting
optician must provide a patient with a copy of the changes to take with him or
her to a provider of choice. The original prescriber will be notified in
writing within fourteen days of any modifications made to the original
prescription and will also be provided with a copy of the patient's
questionnaire and the signed informed consent document.

Sec. 2. RCW 18.34.060 and 1957 c
43 s 6 are each amended to read as follows:

A dispensing optician
is a person who prepares duplications of, or prepares and dispenses lenses,
spectacles, eyeglasses and/or appurtenances thereto to the intended wearers
thereof on written prescriptions from physicians or optometrists, and in
accordance with ((such)) the prescriptions, measures, adapts,
adjusts and fabricates ((such)) the lenses, spectacles,
eyeglasses and/or appurtenances thereto to the human face for the aid or
correction of visual or ocular anomalies of the human eye((: PROVIDED, HOWEVER,
That)). However, contact lenses may be fitted only upon a written
prescription of a physician or optometrist. A refracting optician is a
licensed dispensing optician who has received an endorsement from the secretary
to practice refractometry and to modify prescriptions.

Sec. 3. RCW 18.34.050 and 1984 c
287 s 32 are each amended to read as follows:

The dispensing
optician examining committee shall meet at such times as deemed necessary by
the secretary to prepare and administer the state's licensing examinations and
to provide technical expertise, advice, and make recommendations to the
secretary on the administration of the dispensing optician statute and
disciplinary matters of licensees. The examining committee ((shall))
consists of ((three)) five persons. Four persons must
be primarily engaged in the business of dispensing opticians and ((who
currently)) hold a ((valid)) current license under this
chapter. One of the licensed dispensing optician members shall be a
licensed refracting optician. One member must be a member of the general
public. Members of the committee shall be compensated in accordance with
RCW 43.03.240 and shall be reimbursed for travel expenses in accordance with
RCW 43.03.050 and 43.03.060.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
4. A new section is added
to chapter 18.34 RCW to read as follows:

An applicant for
endorsement as a refracting optician must first be licensed as a dispensing
optician under this chapter and meet the following additional requirements:

(1) Completion of
eighty hours of coursework from an accredited or approved institution or
association including, but not limited to, the following topics: Theory of
refraction, anatomy, pathology, and knowledge of equipment operation;

(2) Completion of two
hundred refractive examinations. The two hundred refractive examinations are
under the direct supervision of a licensed optometrist or a licensed
ophthalmologist who shall certify the completion of the examinations and send
notification directly to the department;

(3) Continuing
education or competency requirements as determined by the secretary.

The secretary shall
adopt by rule the examination requirements to endorse refracting opticians. An
applicant for endorsement as a refracting optician may take the examination if
he or she pays an examination fee, determined by the secretary, as provided in
RCW 43.70.250.

A refracting optician
who has successfully completed the requirements of this section will have the
endorsement of "CRO" placed on his or her dispensing optician license
by the secretary.

Sec. 5. RCW 18.34.080 and 1995 c
198 s 3 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) The
examination to license a dispensing optician shall determine whether the
applicant has a thorough knowledge of the principles governing the practice of
a dispensing optician which is hereby declared necessary for the protection of
the public health. The examining committee may ((approve an examination
prepared or administered by a private testing agency or association of
licensing authorities)) prepare and administer, or approve the
preparation and administration of, examinations for applicants for licensure.
The secretary shall license successful examinees and the license shall be
conspicuously displayed in the place of business of the licensee.

(2) The written and
practical examination to certify a refracting optician shall determine whether
the applicant has a thorough knowledge of the principles governing the practice
of refraction. After the initial exam, the examining committee may prepare
and administer, or approve the preparation and administration of, examinations
for applicants for licensure. The secretary shall issue an endorsement to
successful examinees and the endorsement shall be conspicuously displayed in
the place of business of the licensee.

Sec. 6. RCW 18.34.120 and 1996 c
191 s 18 are each amended to read as follows:

Each licensee ((hereunder))
or holder of an endorsement under this chapter shall pay a renewal
registration fee determined by the secretary as provided in RCW 43.70.250 and
43.70.280. The secretary may adopt rules establishing mandatory continuing
education requirements to be met by persons applying for license or
endorsement renewal.

Sec. 7. RCW 18.34.136 and 1987 c
150 s 19 are each amended to read as follows:

The
uniform disciplinary act, chapter 18.130 RCW, governs unlicensed practice, the
issuance and denial of licenses, and the discipline of licensees under this
chapter. No person may practice or represent himself or herself as a
refracting optician without first having obtained an endorsement from the secretary.

Sec. 8. RCW 18.34.010 and 1957 c
43 s 1 are each amended to read as follows:

Nothing in this chapter
shall:

(1) Be construed to
limit or restrict a duly licensed physician or optometrist or employees working
under the personal supervision of a duly licensed physician or optometrist from
the practices enumerated in this chapter, and each such licensed physician and
optometrist shall have all the rights and privileges which may accrue under
this chapter to dispensing opticians licensed hereunder;

(2) Be construed to
prohibit an unlicensed person from performing mechanical work upon inert matter
in an optical office, laboratory, or shop;

(3) Be construed to
prohibit an unlicensed person from engaging in the sale of spectacles,
eyeglasses, magnifying glasses, goggles, sunglasses, telescopes, binoculars, or
any such articles which are completely preassembled and sold only as
merchandise;

(4) Be construed to
authorize or permit a licensee ((hereunder)) under this chapter
to hold himself or herself out as being able to, or to offer to, or to
undertake to attempt, by any manner of means, to ((examine or)) exercise
eyes, diagnose, treat, ((correct,)) relieve, operate, or
prescribe for any human ailment, ((deficiency,)) deformity, disease,
or injury.

If a licensed
refracting optician is unable to select lenses that provide at a minimum 20/40
vision in either eye to the consumer, he or she shall refer the consumer to a
licensed optometrist or ophthalmologist. If a licensed refracting optician is
observing change of more than plus or minus 1.00 diopter of power in either
eye, he or she shall refer the consumer to a licensed optometrist or
ophthalmologist. A licensed refracting optician shall not modify an original
prescription beyond plus or minus 2 diopters of change provided that there is
no more than plus or minus 1.00 diopter of change at any one time during a
six-month period. A licensed refracting optician may only modify a
prescription for a consumer that has had an eye health exam within two years
for contact lenses and within two years for glasses. A licensed refracting
optician will not modify a prescription of a child ten years old or younger or
an adult sixty-four years or older. A licensed refracting optician will notify
in writing the original prescriber within fourteen days of any modifications
made to the original prescription, and will also provide a copy of the
patient's questionnaire and the signed informed consent document.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
9. RCW 18.34.110 (Existing
practitioner--Fee) and 1991 c 3 s 78 & 1957 c 43 s 11 are each repealed.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
10. RCW 18.34.010, to be
codified between RCW 18.34.141 and 18.34.900, and RCW 18.34.060, to be codified
between RCW 18.34.020 and 18.34.030, are each recodified.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 11. Sections 2, 4 through 6,
and 8 of this act take effect July 1, 2002.

---
END ---