BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF
WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1. RCW 46.10.010 and 1979
ex.s. c 182 s 1 are each amended to read as follows:

As used in this chapter
the words and phrases in this section shall have the designated meanings unless
a different meaning is expressly provided or the context otherwise clearly
indicated.

(1) "Person"
shall mean any individual, firm, partnership, association, or corporation.

(2)
"Snowmobile" shall mean any self-propelled vehicle capable of
traveling over snow or ice, which utilizes as its means of propulsion an
endless belt tread, or cleats, or any combination of these or other similar
means of contact with the surface upon which it is operated, and which is
steered wholly or in part by skis or sled type runners, and which is not
otherwise registered as, or subject to the motor vehicle excise tax in the
state of Washington.

(3) "All terrain
vehicle" shall mean any self-propelled vehicle other than a snowmobile,
capable of cross-country travel on or immediately over land, water, snow, ice,
marsh, swampland, and other natural terrain, including, but not limited to, nonhighway
vehicles defined in RCW 46.09.020, four-wheel vehicles, amphibious
vehicles, ground effect or air cushion vehicles, and any other means of land
transportation deriving motive power from any source other than muscle or wind;
except any vehicle designed primarily for travel on, over, or in the water,
farm vehicles, or any military or law enforcement vehicles.

(4) "Owner"
shall mean the person, other than a lienholder, having the property in or title
to a snowmobile or all terrain vehicle, and entitled to the use or possession
thereof.

(5)
"Operator" means each person who operates, or is in physical control
of, any snowmobile or all terrain vehicle.

(6) "Public
roadway" shall mean the entire width of the right of way of any road or
street designed and ordinarily used for travel or parking of motor vehicles,
which is controlled by a public authority other than the Washington state
department of transportation, and which is open as a matter of right to the
general public for ordinary vehicular traffic.

(7)
"Highways" shall mean the entire width of the right of way of all
primary and secondary state highways, including all portions of the interstate
highway system.

(8) "Dealer"
means a person, partnership, association, or corporation engaged in the
business of selling snowmobiles or all terrain vehicles at wholesale or retail
in this state.

(9)
"Department" shall mean the department of licensing.

(10)
"Director" shall mean the director of the department of licensing.

(11)
"Commission" shall mean the Washington state parks and recreation
commission.

(12) "Hunt"
shall mean any effort to kill, injure, capture, or disturb a wild animal or
wild bird.

(13)
"Committee" means the Washington state parks and recreation
commission snowmobile advisory committee.

--- END ---