BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF
WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec.
1. The legislature declares
that our natural resources are extremely important to the economic well-being
and quality of life of our citizens. These natural resources benefit all the
people of the state, but in particular, the people who use the great outdoors
for recreational purposes.

It is the intent of the
legislature to ensure that there will always be adequate funding to protect the
natural areas of the state. At present, hunters and fishers contribute license
fees, but there is still a very heavy reliance on the general fund for the
support of nonconsumptive users who require and use hiking trails. It is the
intent of the legislature that nonconsumptive users of our natural environment
be given the opportunity to support their recreational interests and use of
hiking trails in a meaningful and equitable fashion.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
2. A new section is added
to chapter 79A.25 RCW to read as follows:

The hiking-only trail
pass program is established under the authority of the committee. A person
using a hiking trail that is designated as a hiking-only trail, located on
public land in the state, must have in his or her possession a valid hiking
trail pass.

The committee must
adopt by rule guidelines for the creation and operation of the hiking-only
trail pass program, including provisions for the retail sale of passes for the
use of hiking-only trails located on public land in the state. The committee
is authorized to use the same retail outlets that sell hunting and fishing
licenses to sell the hiking-only trail passes.

Each public agency that
manages land in the state that is suitable for hiking may designate appropriate
trails on its property as hiking-only trails that require a hiking-only trail
pass.

A hiking-only trail
pass costs two dollars and fifty cents for a one-day pass, and fifteen dollars
for an annual pass. Of that amount, the vendor of the pass may retain fifty
cents, and the department of fish and wildlife may retain twenty-five cents.
Revenue received by the department of fish and wildlife must be deposited in
the state wildlife fund established in RCW 77.12.170. The remaining revenue
must be deposited into the hiking-only trail pass account, established in
section 3 of this act.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
3. A new section is added
to chapter 79A.25 RCW to read as follows:

(1) The hiking-only
trail pass account is created in the custody of the state treasurer. All
designated receipts from the sales of hiking-only trail passes created under
section 2 of this act must be deposited into the account. Expenditures from
the account may be used only for hiking trail maintenance as provided for in
subsection (2) of this section. Only the director or the director's designee
may authorize expenditures from the account. The account is subject to
allotment procedures under chapter 43.88 RCW, but an appropriation is not
required for expenditures.

(2) The
committee must adopt by rule requirements for the distribution of moneys from
the hiking-only trail pass account. The committee must establish a process to
disburse moneys to eligible groups that will use the money to provide hiking
trail maintenance and repair on hiking-only trails located throughout the
state.

---
END ---