BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF
WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec.
1. The legislature finds
that methamphetamine use has increased dramatically in recent years. The
legislature further finds the drug is often manufactured by private citizens,
some of whom are parents of young children. These children have been found by
authorities in situations dangerous to their health and safety either because
they are unsupervised by their parents or openly exposed to drug manufacturing
paraphernalia. The legislature intends that state intervention is necessary in
these situations to the extent necessary to protect the health, safety, and
welfare of the children involved.

Sec. 2. RCW 26.44.020 and 2000 c
162 s 19 are each amended to read as follows:

The definitions in this
section apply throughout this chapter unless the context clearly requires
otherwise.

(1) "Court"
means the superior court of the state of Washington, juvenile department.

(2) "Law
enforcement agency" means the police department, the prosecuting attorney,
the state patrol, the director of public safety, or the office of the sheriff.

(3) "Practitioner
of the healing arts" or "practitioner" means a person licensed
by this state to practice podiatric medicine and surgery, optometry,
chiropractic, nursing, dentistry, osteopathic medicine and surgery, or medicine
and surgery or to provide other health services. The term
"practitioner" includes a duly accredited Christian Science
practitioner: PROVIDED, HOWEVER, That a person who is being furnished
Christian Science treatment by a duly accredited Christian Science practitioner
will not be considered, for that reason alone, a neglected person for the
purposes of this chapter.

(4)
"Institution" means a private or public hospital or any other
facility providing medical diagnosis, treatment or care.

(5)
"Department" means the state department of social and health
services.

(6) "Child"
or "children" means any person under the age of eighteen years of
age.

(7) "Professional
school personnel" include, but are not limited to, teachers, counselors,
administrators, child care facility personnel, and school nurses.

(8) "Social
service counselor" means anyone engaged in a professional capacity during
the regular course of employment in encouraging or promoting the health,
welfare, support or education of children, or providing social services to
adults or families, including mental health, drug and alcohol treatment, and
domestic violence programs, whether in an individual capacity, or as an
employee or agent of any public or private organization or institution.

(9)
"Psychologist" means any person licensed to practice psychology under
chapter 18.83 RCW, whether acting in an individual capacity or as an employee
or agent of any public or private organization or institution.

(10)
"Pharmacist" means any registered pharmacist under chapter 18.64 RCW,
whether acting in an individual capacity or as an employee or agent of any
public or private organization or institution.

(11) "Clergy"
means any regularly licensed or ordained minister, priest, or rabbi of any
church or religious denomination, whether acting in an individual capacity or
as an employee or agent of any public or private organization or institution.

(12) "Abuse or
neglect" means the injury, sexual abuse, sexual exploitation, negligent
treatment, or maltreatment of a child by any person under circumstances which
indicate that the child's health, welfare, and safety is harmed, excluding
conduct permitted under RCW 9A.16.100. An abused child is a child who has been
subjected to child abuse or neglect as defined in this section.

(13) "Child
protective services section" means the child protective services section
of the department.

(14) "Sexual
exploitation" includes: (a) Allowing, permitting, or encouraging a child
to engage in prostitution by any person; or (b) allowing, permitting,
encouraging, or engaging in the obscene or pornographic photographing, filming,
or depicting of a child by any person.

(15) "Negligent
treatment or maltreatment" means an act or omission that evidences a
serious disregard of consequences of such magnitude as to constitute a clear
and present danger to the child's health, welfare, and safety. The fact that
siblings share a bedroom is not, in and of itself, negligent treatment or
maltreatment.

A rebuttable
presumption that a child has suffered negligent treatment or maltreatment shall
exist if, during investigation conducted by the department under this chapter
or by law enforcement, a child is found in a place where methamphetamine is
being manufactured.

(16) "Child protective
services" means those services provided by the department designed to
protect children from child abuse and neglect and safeguard such children from
future abuse and neglect, and conduct investigations of child abuse and neglect
reports. Investigations may be conducted regardless of the location of the
alleged abuse or neglect. Child protective services includes referral to
services to ameliorate conditions that endanger the welfare of children, the
coordination of necessary programs and services relevant to the prevention,
intervention, and treatment of child abuse and neglect, and services to
children to ensure that each child has a permanent home. In determining
whether protective services should be provided, the department shall not decline
to provide such services solely because of the child's unwillingness or
developmental inability to describe the nature and severity of the abuse or
neglect.

(17) "Malice"
or "maliciously" means an evil intent, wish, or design to vex, annoy,
or injure another person. Such malice may be inferred from an act done in
willful disregard of the rights of another, or an act wrongfully done without
just cause or excuse, or an act or omission of duty betraying a willful
disregard of social duty.

(18) "Sexually aggressive
youth" means a child who is defined in RCW 74.13.075(1)(b) as being a
sexually aggressive youth.

(19)
"Unfounded" means available information indicates that, more likely
than not, child abuse or neglect did not occur. No unfounded allegation of child
abuse or neglect may be disclosed to a child-placing agency, private adoption
agency, or any other provider licensed under chapter 74.15 RCW.

---
END ---