BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF
WASHINGTON:

WASHINGTON STATE PENSION BOARD

NEW SECTION. Sec.
1. The Washington state
pension board, which may be known as the pension board, is created as an
independent governing board to manage all of the public retirement systems of
the state of Washington. Members shall serve in a trustee capacity and with
fiduciary responsibility in administrating the assets of the public retirement
systems which are declared a trust.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
2. The pension board
consists of eleven members as follows: One retired and one active member from
the public employees' retirement system; one retired and one active member from
the teachers' or school employees' retirement systems; one retired and one
active member from the law enforcement officers' and fire fighters', state
patrol, and judges' retirement systems; the state treasurer; the director of
financial management; one employer member representing city, county, and
municipal governments; and two members at large appointed by the governor. All
pension board members are voting members.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
3. The retired and active
pension board members shall be elected by the membership from their respective
retirement systems and the department of retirement systems shall conduct the
elections. The employer member from city, county, and municipal governments
shall be appointed by the governor from a list of three names collectively
submitted by the association of Washington cities and the Washington state
association of counties. Terms of office for retired and active members are
five years. In order to stagger the terms, the initial term for the (1) public
employees' retirement system members is one year; (2) teachers' or school
employees' retirement systems' members is three years; (3) law enforcement
officers' and fire fighters', state patrol, and judges' retirement systems'
members is five years; and (4) member representing city, county, and municipal
governments is five years. The two members appointed by the governor have
five-year appointments with one member serving an initial term of three years.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
4. The pension board shall
establish an operational budget sufficient to perform its duties and, as
appropriate and reasonable, the department of retirement systems shall provide
resources and staff assistance.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
5. The pension board has the
authority to obtain by employment or contract the services necessary to
exercise its trustee powers and duties, including hiring the director of the
department of retirement systems, actuarial, auditing and legal services, and
procuring and disposing of the goods and property necessary to exercise the
pension board's authority in performing its duties. In exercising their
authority under this section, pension board members are subject to the
fiduciary duties under this chapter.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
6. The pension board may
delegate functions that a prudent trustee or administrator acting in a like
capacity and familiar with those matters could properly delegate under the
circumstances. In doing so, the pension board shall exercise reasonable care,
skill, and caution in:

(1) Selecting an agent;

(2) Establishing scope
and terms of the delegation consistent with the purpose and terms of the
retirement program; and

(3) Periodically
reviewing the agent's performance and compliance with the terms of the
delegation.

In performing a delegated
function, an agent owes a duty to the retirement systems and to its
participants and beneficiaries to comply with the duties imposed by section 7
of this act. The pension board, if in compliance with this section, is not
liable to the retirement system or its participants or beneficiaries for the
decisions or actions of the agent to whom the function was delegated. By
accepting the delegation of a function from the pension board, an agent submits
to the jurisdiction of the courts of this state. The pension board may limit
the authority of an administrator to delegate.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
7. The pension board shall
discharge its duties with respect to the retirement system:

(1) Solely in the
interest of the participants and beneficiaries;

(2) For the exclusive
purpose of providing benefits to participants and beneficiaries and paying
reasonable expenses of administrating the system;

(3) With the care,
skill, and caution under the circumstances then prevailing which a prudent
person acting in a like capacity and familiar with those matters would use in
the conduct of an activity of like character and purpose;

(4) Impartially taking
into account any differing interests of participants and beneficiaries;

(5) Incurring only
costs that are appropriate and reasonable; and

(6) In accordance with
a good-faith interpretation of the law governing the retirement program and
system.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
8. In managing the assets of
the retirement system pursuant to section 7 of this act, the pension board must
consider the following:

(1) General economic
conditions;

(2) Possible effect of
inflation and deflation;

(3) Expected total
return on investments, including income and appreciation of capital;

(4) Needs for
liquidity, regular income, and preservation of capital;

(5) Making a reasonable
effort to verify facts relevant to the investment of assets as reported by the
state investment board.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
9. The pension board's
primary duties include adopting actuarial assumptions, setting contribution
rates needed to keep the pension system properly funded, and proposing
necessary legislation. The pension board has no authority to invest the
pension funds.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
10. The state auditor may
conduct a performance audit as necessary but not less than once every four
years. The pension board shall pay for necessary expenses incurred by the
state auditor in performing this function from the trust funds.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
11. The state investment
board shall provide the pension board with in-depth quarterly reports and its
annual report that shall be combined with the pension board's annual and consolidated
summary reports. The pension board shall also prepare a condensed version of
its annual report, in layman's terms, for distribution to all participants and
beneficiaries of the pension systems.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
12. A pension board member or
other fiduciary who breaches a duty under this chapter, as determined under
section 14 of this act, is personally liable to the public retirement systems
for any losses resulting from the breach and any profits made by the pension
board member or other fiduciary through use of assets of the system by the
pension board member or fiduciary. An agreement that purports to limit the
liability of the board member or fiduciary for a breach of duty is void. The
public retirement systems may insure itself against liability or losses
occurring because of a breach of duty by a pension board member or other
fiduciary. A pension board member or other fiduciary may insure against
liability or losses occurring because of a breach of duty if the insurance is
purchased or provided either by the pension board member or fiduciary
personally, or, on the pension board member or fiduciary's behalf by the state
of Washington, the public retirement systems, a public employer whose employees
participate in the retirement program served by the pension board or fiduciary,
an employee representative whose members participate in the retirement program
served by the pension board or fiduciary, or the pension board or fiduciary's
employer.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
13. The pension board, when
managing the assets of the public retirement systems, may deliberate about, or
make tentative final decisions, in executive session if disclosure of the
deliberations or decisions would jeopardize the ability to implement them. A
record of the public retirement system that discloses deliberations, or a
tentative or final decision, made in an executive session is not an open or
public record under chapter 42.17 RCW.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
14. An action may be
maintained in superior court of Thurston county by a public employer,
participant, beneficiary, or fiduciary:

(1) To enjoin an act,
practice, or omission that is a violation under this chapter;

(2) For appropriate
equitable relief for a breach of trust under section 12 of this act; or

(3) For other
appropriate equitable relief to redress the violation of or to enforce this
chapter.

In an action under this
section by a participant, beneficiary, or fiduciary, the court may award
reasonable attorneys' fees and costs to either party.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
15. A new section is added
to chapter 42.17 RCW to read as follows:

Chapter 41.-- RCW
(sections 1 through 14 and 27 through 49 of this act) is exempt from the
disclosure requirements under this chapter.

Sec. 16. RCW 41.50.020 and
1975-'76 2nd ex.s. c 105 s 4 are each amended to read as follows:

There is created a
department of state government to be known as the department of retirement
systems. The executive and administrative head of the department shall be the
director, who shall be appointed by the ((governor)) Washington state
pension board with the consent of the senate. The director shall serve at
the pleasure of the ((governor)) pension board and may be removed
upon written notification by the ((governor)) pension board to
the respective retirement boards.

The director shall have
complete charge of and supervisory powers over the department and shall be paid
a salary fixed by the governor in accordance with the provisions of RCW
43.03.040. If a vacancy occurs in the position of director while the senate is
not in session, the ((governor)) pension board shall make a
temporary appointment until the next meeting of the senate at which time ((he))
the pension board shall present to that body the name of the person
appointed to the position of director.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
17. The director of
retirement systems shall conduct an election among retirement systems members
for the election of pension board members as set forth under section 3 of this
act.

Sec. 18. RCW 41.45.020 and 1998 c
341 s 402 and 1998 c 283 s 1 are each reenacted and amended to read as follows:

As used in this
chapter, the following terms have the meanings indicated unless the context
clearly requires otherwise.

(1) (("Council"))
"Pension board" means the Washington state pension ((funding
council)) board created in ((RCW 41.45.100)) section 1 of
this act.

(2)
"Department" means the department of retirement systems.

(3) "Law
enforcement officers' and fire fighters' retirement system plan 1" and
"law enforcement officers' and fire fighters' retirement system plan
2" mean the benefits and funding provisions under chapter 41.26 RCW.

(4) "Public
employees' retirement system plan 1" and "public employees'
retirement system plan 2" mean the benefits and funding provisions under
chapter 41.40 RCW.

(5) "Teachers'
retirement system plan 1," "teachers' retirement system plan 2,"
and "teachers' retirement system plan 3" mean the benefits and
funding provisions under chapter 41.32 RCW.

(6) "School
employees' retirement system plan 2" and "school employees' retirement
system plan 3" mean the benefits and funding provisions under chapter
41.35 RCW.

(7) "Washington
state patrol retirement system" means the retirement benefits provided
under chapter 43.43 RCW.

(8) "Unfunded
liability" means the unfunded actuarial accrued liability of a retirement
system.

(9) "Actuary"
or "state actuary" means the state actuary employed under chapter
44.44 RCW.

(10) "State
retirement systems" means the retirement systems listed in RCW 41.50.030.

(11) (("Work
group" means the pension funding work group created in RCW 41.45.120.

(12))) "Classified employee" means a member
of the Washington school employees' retirement system plan 2 or plan 3 as
defined in RCW 41.35.010.

(((13))) (12)
"Teacher" means a member of the teachers' retirement system as
defined in RCW 41.32.010(15).

Sec. 19. RCW 41.45.020 and 2000 c
247 s 502 are each amended to read as follows:

As used in this
chapter, the following terms have the meanings indicated unless the context
clearly requires otherwise.

(1) (("Council"))
"Pension board" means the Washington state pension ((funding
council)) board created in ((RCW 41.45.100)) section 1 of
this act.

(2)
"Department" means the department of retirement systems.

(3) "Law
enforcement officers' and fire fighters' retirement system plan 1" and
"law enforcement officers' and fire fighters' retirement system plan
2" mean the benefits and funding provisions under chapter 41.26 RCW.

(4) "Public employees'
retirement system plan 1," "public employees' retirement system plan
2," and "public employees' retirement system plan 3" mean the
benefits and funding provisions under chapter 41.40 RCW.

(5) "Teachers'
retirement system plan 1," "teachers' retirement system plan 2,"
and "teachers' retirement system plan 3" mean the benefits and
funding provisions under chapter 41.32 RCW.

(6) "School
employees' retirement system plan 2" and "school employees'
retirement system plan 3" mean the benefits and funding provisions under
chapter 41.35 RCW.

(7) "Washington
state patrol retirement system" means the retirement benefits provided
under chapter 43.43 RCW.

(8) "Unfunded
liability" means the unfunded actuarial accrued liability of a retirement
system.

(9) "Actuary"
or "state actuary" means the state actuary employed under chapter
44.44 RCW.

(10) "State
retirement systems" means the retirement systems listed in RCW 41.50.030.

(11) (("Work
group" means the pension funding work group created in RCW 41.45.120.

(12))) "Classified employee" means a member
of the Washington school employees' retirement system plan 2 or plan 3 as
defined in RCW 41.35.010.

(((13))) (12)
"Teacher" means a member of the teachers' retirement system as
defined in RCW 41.32.010(15).

Sec. 20. RCW 41.45.030 and 1995 c
233 s 1 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) Beginning ((September
1, 1995)) on the effective date of this section, and every two years
thereafter, the state actuary shall submit to the ((council)) pension
board information regarding the experience and financial condition of each
state retirement system. The ((council)) pension board shall
review this and such other information as it may require.

(2) By December 31, ((1995))
2001, and every two years thereafter, the ((council)) pension
board, by affirmative vote of ((five councilmembers)) six pension
board members, shall adopt the following long-term economic assumptions:

(a) Growth in system
membership;

(b) Growth in salaries,
exclusive of merit or longevity increases;

(c) Growth in
inflation; and

(d) Investment rate of
return.

The ((council)) pension
board shall ((work with the department of retirement systems, the state
actuary, and the executive director of the state investment board, and shall))
consider long-term historical averages, in developing the economic assumptions.

(3) The assumptions
adopted by the ((council)) pension board shall be used by the
state actuary in conducting all actuarial studies of the state retirement
systems.

Sec. 21. RCW 41.45.060 and 2000
2nd sp.s. c 1 s 905 and 2000 c 247 s 504 are each reenacted and amended to read
as follows:

(1) The state actuary
shall provide actuarial valuation results based on the assumptions adopted
under RCW 41.45.030.

(2) Not later than ((September
30, 1998)) December 31, 2001, and every two years thereafter,
consistent with the assumptions adopted under RCW 41.45.030, the ((council))
pension board shall adopt and may make changes to:

(a) A basic state
contribution rate for the law enforcement officers' and fire fighters'
retirement system;

(b) Basic employer
contribution rates for the public employees' retirement system, the teachers'
retirement system, and the Washington state patrol retirement system to be used
in the ensuing biennial period; and

(c) A basic employer
contribution rate for the school employees' retirement system for funding the
public employees' retirement system plan 1.

((For the 1999-2001
fiscal biennium, the rates adopted by the council shall be effective for the
period designated in section 902, chapter 1, Laws of 2000 2nd sp. sess. and RCW
41.45.0602.))

(3) The employer and
state contribution rates adopted by the ((council)) pension board
shall be the level percentages of pay that are needed:

(a) To fully amortize
the total costs of the public employees' retirement system plan 1, the
teachers' retirement system plan 1, the law enforcement officers' and fire
fighters' retirement system plan 1, and the unfunded liability of the
Washington state patrol retirement system not later than June 30, 2024, except
as provided in subsection (5) of this section;

(b) To also continue to
fully fund the public employees' retirement system plans 2 and 3, the teachers'
retirement system plans 2 and 3, the school employees' retirement system plans
2 and 3, and the law enforcement officers' and fire fighters' retirement system
plan 2 in accordance with RCW 41.45.061, 41.45.067, and this section; and

(c) For the law
enforcement officers' and fire fighters' system plan 2 the rate charged to
employers, except as provided in RCW 41.26.450, shall be thirty percent of the
cost of the retirement system and the rate charged to the state shall be twenty
percent of the cost of the retirement system.

(4) The aggregate
actuarial cost method shall be used to calculate a combined plan 2 and 3
employer contribution rate.

(5) An amount equal to
the amount of extraordinary investment gains as defined in RCW 41.31.020 shall
be used to shorten the amortization period for the public employees' retirement
system plan 1 and the teachers' retirement system plan 1.

(6) The ((council))
pension board shall immediately notify the directors of the office of
financial management and department of retirement systems of the state and
employer contribution rates adopted.

(7) The director of the
department of retirement systems shall collect those rates adopted by the ((council))
pension board.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
22. RCW 41.45.0602
(Washington state patrol basic employer contribution rate) is decodified.

Sec. 23. RCW 41.45.090 and 1998 c
283 s 7 are each amended to read as follows:

The department shall
collect and keep in convenient form such data as shall be necessary for an
actuarial valuation of the assets and liabilities of the state retirement
systems, and for making an actuarial investigation into the mortality, service,
compensation, and other experience of the members and beneficiaries of those
systems. The department and state actuary shall enter into a memorandum of
understanding regarding the specific data the department will collect, when it
will be collected, and how it will be maintained. The department shall notify
the ((state actuary)) pension board of any changes it makes, or
intends to make, in the collection and maintenance of such data.

At least once in each
six-year period, the state actuary shall conduct an actuarial experience study
of the mortality, service, compensation and other experience of the members and
beneficiaries of each state retirement system, and into the financial condition
of each system. The results of each investigation shall be filed with the
department, the office of financial management, the budget writing committees
of the Washington house of representatives and senate, and the pension ((funding
council)) board. Upon the basis of such actuarial investigation the
department, with approval of the pension board, shall adopt such tables,
schedules, factors, and regulations as are deemed necessary in the light of the
findings of the actuary or the pension board for the proper operation of
the state retirement systems.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
24. The following acts or
parts of acts are each repealed:

(1) RCW 41.45.100 (Pension funding
council--Created) and 1998 c 283 s 2;

(2) RCW 41.45.110 (Pension funding
council--Audits required) and 1998 c 283 s 3; and

(3) RCW 41.45.120 (Pension funding work
group) and 1998 c 283 s 4.

Sec. 25. RCW 41.40.650 and 1989 c
273 s 24 are each amended to read as follows:

The required
contribution rates to the retirement system for both members and employers
shall be established by the ((director)) Washington state pension
board from time to time as may be necessary ((upon the advice of the state
actuary. The state actuary shall use the aggregate actuarial cost method to
calculate contribution rates)). The employer contribution rate calculated
under this section shall be used only for the purpose of determining the amount
of employer contributions to be deposited in the plan 2 fund from the total
employer contributions collected under RCW 41.40.048.

Contribution rates
required to fund the costs of the retirement system shall always be equal for
members and employers, except as herein provided. Effective January 1, 1987,
however, no member or employer contributions are required for any calendar month
in which the member is not granted service credit. Any adjustments in
contribution rates required from time to time for future costs shall likewise
be shared equally by the members and employers.

Any increase in the
contribution rate required as the result of a failure of an employer to make
any contribution required by this section shall be borne in full by the
employer not making the contribution.

The director shall
notify all employers of any pending adjustment in the required contribution
rate and such increase shall be announced at least thirty days prior to the
effective date of the change.

Members contributions
required by this section shall be deducted from the members compensation
earnable each payroll period. The members contribution and the employers
contribution shall be remitted directly to the department within fifteen days
following the end of the calendar month during which the payroll period ends.

Sec. 26. RCW 41.26.450 and 1996 c
38 s 3 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) The required
contribution rates to the plan 2 system for members, employers, and the state
of Washington shall be established by the ((director)) Washington
state pension board from time to time as may be necessary ((upon the
advice of the state actuary. The state actuary shall use the aggregate
actuarial cost method to calculate contribution rates)).

(2) Except as provided
in subsection (3) of this section, the member, the employer and the state shall
each contribute the following shares of the cost of the retirement system:

Member 50%

Employer 30%

State 20%

(3) Port districts
established under Title 53 RCW and institutions of higher education as defined
in RCW 28B.10.016 shall contribute both the employer and state shares of the
cost of the retirement system for any of their employees who are law enforcement
officers. Institutions of higher education shall contribute both the employer
and the state shares of the cost of the retirement system for any of their
employees who are fire fighters.

(4) Effective January
1, 1987, however, no member or employer contributions are required for any
calendar month in which the member is not granted service credit.

(5) Any adjustments in
contribution rates required from time to time for future costs shall likewise
be shared proportionally by the members, employers, and the state.

(6) Any increase in the
contribution rate required as the result of a failure of the state or of an
employer to make any contribution required by this section shall be borne in
full by the state or by that employer not making the contribution.

(7) The director shall
notify all employers of any pending adjustment in the required contribution
rate and such increase shall be announced at least thirty days prior to the
effective date of the change.

(8) Members'
contributions required by this section shall be deducted from the members basic
salary each payroll period. The members contribution and the employers
contribution shall be remitted directly to the department within fifteen days
following the end of the calendar month during which the payroll period ends.
The state's contribution required by this section shall be transferred to the
plan 2 fund from the total contributions transferred by the state treasurer
under RCW 41.45.060 and 41.45.070.

UNIFORM MANAGEMENT OF PUBLIC EMPLOYEE
RETIREMENT SYSTEMS

NEW SECTION. Sec.
27. SHORT TITLE. This
subchapter may be cited as the uniform management of public employee retirement
systems act.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
28. Sections 27 through 49 of
this act apply to the management of public employee retirement systems unless
they conflict with other statutes, in which case the other statutes control.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
29. DEFINITIONS. The
definitions in this section apply throughout this subchapter unless the context
clearly requires otherwise.

(1)
"Administrator" means a person primarily responsible for the
management of a retirement system or, if no person is clearly designated, the
trustee of the system who has the ultimate authority to manage the system.

(2) "Agent group
of programs" means a group of retirement programs which shares
administrative and investment functions but maintains a separate account for
each retirement program so that assets accumulated for a particular program may
be used to pay benefits only for that program's participants and beneficiaries.

(3) "Appropriate
grouping of programs" means:

(a) For defined benefit
plans, a cost-sharing program or an agent group of programs; and

(b) For defined
contribution plans, a group of retirement programs which shares administrative
and investment functions.

(4)
"Beneficiary" means a person, other than the participant, who is
designated by a participant or by a retirement program to receive a benefit
under the program.

(5) "Code"
means the federal internal revenue code of 1986, as amended.

(6) "Cost-sharing
program" means a retirement program for the employees of more than one
public employer in which all assets accumulated for the payment of benefits may
be used to pay benefits to any participants or beneficiaries of the program.

(7) "Defined
benefit plan" means a retirement program other than a defined contribution
plan.

(8) "Defined
contribution plan" means a retirement program that provides for an
individual account for each participant and for benefits based solely upon the
amount contributed to the participant's account; any income, expenses, gains,
and losses credited or charged to the account; and any forfeitures of accounts
of other participants that may be allocated to the participant's account.

(9)
"Employee" includes an officer of a public employer.

(10) "Fair
value" means the amount that a willing buyer would pay a willing seller
for an asset in a current sale, as determined in good faith by a fiduciary.

(11)
"Fiduciary" means a person who:

(a) Exercises any
discretionary authority to manage a retirement system;

(b) Exercises any
authority to invest or manage assets of a system;

(c) Provides investment
advice for a fee or other direct or indirect compensation with respect to
assets of a system or has any authority or responsibility to do so; or

(d) Is a trustee or a
member of a board of trustees.

(12)
"Furnish" means:

(a) To deliver personally,
to mail to the last known place of employment or home address of the intended
recipient, or, if reasonable grounds exist to believe that the intended
recipient would receive it in ordinary course, to transmit by any other usual
means of communication; or

(b) To provide to the
intended recipient's public employer if reasonable grounds exist to believe
that the employer will make a good faith effort to deliver personally, by mail,
or by other usual means of communication.

(13) "Governing
law" means state and local laws establishing or authorizing the creation
of a retirement program or system and the principal state and local laws and
regulations governing the management of a retirement program or system or assets
of either.

(14) "Guaranteed
benefit policy" means an insurance policy or contract to the extent the
policy or contract provides for benefits in a guaranteed amount. The term
includes any surplus in a separate account, but excludes any other portion of a
separate account.

(15)
"Insurer" means a company, service, or organization qualified to
engage in the business of insurance in this state.

(16)
"Nonforfeitable benefit" means an immediate or deferred benefit that
arises from a participant's service, is unconditional, and is enforceable
against the retirement system.

(17)
"Participant" means an individual who is or has been an employee
enrolled in a retirement program and who is or may become eligible to receive,
or is currently receiving, a benefit under the program, or whose beneficiaries
are or may become eligible to receive a benefit. The term does not include an
individual who is no longer an employee of a public employer and has not
accrued any nonforfeitable benefits under the program.

(18) "Public
employer" means this state or any political subdivision, or any agency or
instrumentality of this state or any political subdivision, whose employees are
participants in a retirement program.

(19) "Retirement
program" means a program of rights and obligations which a public employer
establishes or maintains and which, by its express terms or as a result of
surrounding circumstances:

(a) Provides retirement
income to employees; or

(b) Results in a
deferral of income by employees for periods extending to the termination of
covered employment or beyond.

(20) "Retirement
system" means an entity established or maintained by a public employer to
manage one or more retirement programs, or to invest or manage the assets of
one or more retirement programs.

(21) "State"
means a state of the United States, the District of Columbia, Puerto Rico, the
United States Virgin Islands, or any territory or insular possession subject to
the jurisdiction of the United States.

(22)
"Trustee" means a person who has ultimate authority to manage a
retirement system or to invest or manage its assets.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
30. SCOPE. This subchapter
applies to all retirement programs and retirement systems, except:

(1) A retirement
program that is unfunded and is maintained by a public employer solely for the
purpose of providing deferred compensation for a select group of management
employees or employees who rank in the top five percent of employees of that
employer based on compensation;

(2) A severance-pay
arrangement under which:

(a) Payments are made
solely on account of the termination of an employee's service and are not
contingent upon the employee's retiring;

(b) The total amount of
the payments does not exceed the equivalent of twice the employee's total
earnings from the public employer during the year immediately preceding the
termination of service; and

(c) All payments are
completed within twenty-four months after the termination of service;

(3) An arrangement or
payment made on behalf of an employee because the employee is covered by Title
II of the social security act, as amended;

(4) A qualified
governmental excess benefit arrangement within the meaning of section 415(m) of
the code;

(5) An individual
retirement account or individual retirement annuity within the meaning of
section 408 of the code;

(6) A retirement
program consisting solely of annuity contracts or custodial accounts satisfying
the requirements of section 403(b) of the code; or

(7) A program
maintained solely for the purpose of complying with workers' compensation laws
or disability insurance laws.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
31. ESTABLISHMENT OF TRUST.
(1) Except as otherwise provided in subsection (2) of this section, all assets
of a retirement system are held in trust. The trustee has the exclusive
authority, subject to this subchapter, to invest and manage those assets.

(2) Assets of a
retirement system which consist of insurance contracts or policies issued by an
insurer, assets of an insurer, and assets of the system held by an insurer need
not be held in trust.

(3) If an insurer
issues a guaranteed benefit policy to a retirement system, assets of the system
include the policy but not assets of the insurer.

(4) If a retirement
system invests in a security issued by an investment company registered under
the investment company act of 1940, the assets of the system include the
security but not the assets of the investment company.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
32. POWERS OF TRUSTEE. (1)
In addition to other powers conferred by the governing law, a trustee has
exclusive authority, consistent with the trustee's duties under this
subchapter, to:

(a) Establish an
administrative budget sufficient to perform the trustee's duties and, as
appropriate and reasonable, draw upon assets of the retirement system to fund
the budget;

(b) Obtain by
employment or contract the services necessary to exercise the trustee's powers
and perform the trustee's duties, including actuarial, auditing, custodial,
investment, and legal services; and

(c) Procure and dispose
of goods and property necessary to exercise the trustee's powers and perform
the trustee's duties.

(2) In exercising its
authority under this section, a trustee is subject to the fiduciary duties of
this subchapter, but not to civil service, personnel, procurement, or similar
general laws relating to subsection (1) of this section.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
33. DELEGATION OF FUNCTIONS.
(1) A trustee or administrator may delegate functions that a prudent trustee or
administrator acting in a like capacity and familiar with those matters could properly
delegate under the circumstances.

(2) The trustee or
administrator shall exercise reasonable care, skill, and caution in:

(a) Selecting an agent;

(b) Establishing the
scope and terms of the delegation, consistent with the purposes and terms of the
retirement program; and

(c) Periodically
reviewing the agent's performance and compliance with the terms of the
delegation.

(3) In performing a
delegated function, an agent owes a duty to the retirement system and to its
participants and beneficiaries to comply with the terms of the delegation and,
if a fiduciary, to comply with the duties imposed by section 34 of this act.

(4) A trustee or
administrator who complies with subsections (1) and (2) of this section is not
liable to the retirement system or to its participants or beneficiaries for the
decisions or actions of the agent to whom the function was delegated.

(5) By accepting the
delegation of a function from the trustee or administrator, an agent submits to
the jurisdiction of the courts of this state.

(6) A trustee may limit
the authority of an administrator to delegate functions under this section.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
34. GENERAL FIDUCIARY
DUTIES. A trustee or other fiduciary shall discharge duties with respect to a
retirement system:

(1) Solely in the
interest of the participants and beneficiaries;

(2) For the exclusive
purpose of providing benefits to participants and beneficiaries and paying
reasonable expenses of administering the system;

(3) With the care,
skill, and caution under the circumstances then prevailing which a prudent
person acting in a like capacity and familiar with those matters would use in
the conduct of an activity of like character and purpose;

(4) Impartially, taking
into account any differing interests of participants and beneficiaries;

(5) Incurring only
costs that are appropriate and reasonable; and

(6) In accordance with
a good-faith interpretation of the law governing the retirement program and
system.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
35. DUTIES OF TRUSTEE IN
INVESTING AND MANAGING ASSETS OF RETIREMENT SYSTEM. (1) In investing and
managing assets of a retirement system pursuant to section 34 of this act, a
trustee with authority to invest and manage assets:

(a) Shall consider
among other circumstances:

(i) General economic
conditions;

(ii) The possible
effect of inflation or deflation;

(iii) The role that
each investment or course of action plays within the overall portfolio of the
retirement program or appropriate grouping of programs;

(iv) The expected total
return from income and the appreciation of capital;

(v) Needs for
liquidity, regularity of income, and preservation or appreciation of capital;
and

(vi) For defined
benefit plans, the adequacy of funding for the plan based on reasonable
actuarial factors;

(b) Shall diversify the
investments of each retirement program or appropriate grouping of programs
unless the trustee reasonably determines that, because of special
circumstances, it is clearly prudent not to do so;

(c) Shall make a
reasonable effort to verify facts relevant to the investment and management of
assets of a retirement system;

(d) May invest in any
kind of property or type of investment consistent with this subchapter; and

(e) May consider
benefits created by an investment in addition to investment return only if the
trustee determines that the investment providing these collateral benefits
would be prudent even without the collateral benefits.

(2) A trustee with
authority to invest and manage assets of a retirement system shall adopt a
statement of investment objectives and policies for each retirement program or
appropriate grouping of programs. The statement must include the desired rate
of return on assets overall, the desired rates of return and acceptable levels
of risk for each asset class, asset-allocation goals, guidelines for the
delegation of authority, and information on the types of reports to be used to
evaluate investment performance. At least annually, the trustee shall review
the statement and change or reaffirm it.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
36. SPECIAL APPLICATION OF
DUTIES. (1) A trustee may return a contribution, with interest, to a
public employer or employee, or make alternative arrangements for
reimbursement, if the trustee determines the contribution was made because of a
mistake of fact or law.

(2) Upon termination of
a retirement program, a trustee may return to a public employer any assets of
the program remaining after all liabilities of the program to participants and
beneficiaries have been satisfied.

(3) If a retirement
program provides for individual accounts and permits a participant or
beneficiary to exercise control over the assets in such an account and a
participant or beneficiary exercises control over those assets:

(a) The participant or
beneficiary is not a fiduciary by reason of the exercise of control; and

(b) A person who is
otherwise a fiduciary is not liable for any loss, or by reason of any breach of
fiduciary duty, resulting from the participant's or beneficiary's exercise of
control.

(4) If an insurer
issues to a retirement system a contract or policy that is supported by the
insurer's general account but is not a guaranteed benefit policy, the insurer
complies with section 34 of this act if it manages the assets of the general
account with the care, skill, and caution under the circumstances then
prevailing which a prudent person acting in a like capacity and familiar with those
matters would use in the conduct of an activity of like character and purpose,
taking into account all obligations supported by the general account.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
37. REVIEWING COMPLIANCE. In
evaluating performance of a trustee or other fiduciary:

(1) Compliance by the
trustee or other fiduciary with sections 33 through 36 of this act must be
determined in light of the facts and circumstances existing at the time of the
trustee or fiduciary's decision or action and not by hindsight.

(2) The trustee's
investment and management decisions must be evaluated not in isolation but in
the context of the trust portfolio as a whole and as a part of an overall
investment strategy having risk and return objectives reasonably suited to the
program or appropriate grouping of programs.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
38. FIDUCIARY LIABILITY. (1)
A trustee or other fiduciary who breaches a duty imposed by this subchapter is
personally liable to a retirement system for any losses resulting from the
breach and any profits made by the trustee or other fiduciary through use of
assets of the system by the trustee or other fiduciary. The trustee or other
fiduciary is subject to other equitable remedies as the court considers
appropriate, including removal.

(2) An agreement that
purports to limit the liability of a trustee or other fiduciary for a breach of
duty under this subchapter is void.

(3) A retirement system
may insure itself against liability or losses occurring because of a breach of
duty under this subchapter by a trustee or other fiduciary.

(4) A trustee or other
fiduciary may insure against liability or losses occurring because of a breach
of duty under this subchapter if the insurance is purchased or provided either
by the trustee or fiduciary personally or, on the trustee or fiduciary's
behalf, by this state, the retirement system, a public employer whose employees
participate in a retirement program served by the trustee or fiduciary, an
employee representative whose members participate in a retirement program
served by the trustee or fiduciary, or the trustee or fiduciary's employer.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
39. OPEN OR PUBLIC MEETINGS
AND RECORDS. (1) A multimember body having authority to invest or manage
assets of a retirement system may deliberate about, or make tentative or final
decisions on, investments or other financial matters in executive session if
disclosure of the deliberations or decisions jeopardizes the ability to
implement a decision or to achieve investment objectives.

(2) A record of a
retirement system that discloses deliberations about, or a tentative or final
decision on, investments or other financial matters is not an open or public
record under chapter 42.30 RCW to the extent and so long as its disclosure
jeopardizes the ability to implement an investment decision or program or to
achieve investment objectives.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
40. DISCLOSURE TO PUBLIC.
(1) An administrator shall prepare and disseminate:

(a) A summary plan
description of each retirement program;

(b) A summary
description of any material modification in the terms of the program and any
material change in the information required to be contained in the summary plan
description, to the extent the modification or change has not been integrated
into an updated summary plan description;

(c) An annual
disclosure of financial and actuarial status; and

(d) An annual report.

(2) An administrator
shall make available for public examination in the principal office of the
administrator and in other places if necessary to make the information
reasonably available to participants:

(a) The governing law
of the retirement program and system;

(b) The most recent
summary plan description;

(c) Summary
descriptions of modifications or changes described in subsection (1)(b) of this
section that have been provided to participants and beneficiaries but have not
yet been integrated into the summary plan description;

(d) The most recent
annual disclosure of financial and actuarial status; and

(e) The most recent
annual report.

(3) Upon written
request by a participant, beneficiary, or member of the public, an
administrator shall provide a copy of any publication described in subsection
(1)(b) of this section. Except as otherwise provided in section 41(1) of this
act, the administrator may charge a reasonable fee to cover the cost of
providing copies. The administrator shall provide the copies within thirty
days after the request or, if a fee is charged, within thirty days after
receiving payment.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
41. DISCLOSURE TO
PARTICIPANTS AND BENEFICIARIES. (1) An administrator shall furnish to each
participant and to each beneficiary who is receiving benefits under a
retirement program:

(a) A copy of the most
recent summary plan description, along with any summary descriptions of
modifications or changes described in section 40(1)(b) of this act, within
three months after a person becomes a participant or, in the case of a
beneficiary, within three months after a person first receives benefits, or, if
later, within four months after the retirement program becomes subject to this
subchapter;

(b) The summary
description of any modifications or changes described in section 40(1)(b) of
this act, within seven months after the end of the fiscal year in which a
modification or change has been made;

(c) A copy of an
updated summary plan description that integrates all modifications and changes
at intervals not exceeding five years; and

(d) The annual report
within seven months after the end of each fiscal year.

(2) An administrator
shall provide to a participant or beneficiary a statement containing
information that would permit the participant or beneficiary to estimate
projected benefits reasonably, to the extent the information is regularly
maintained by the retirement system. The information must be provided with the
annual report or upon written request of the participant or beneficiary. The
information need not be provided to a participant or beneficiary who is
currently receiving benefits.

(3) A participant who
is not currently receiving benefits is entitled without charge to one statement
under subsection (2) of this section during any fiscal year. An administrator
may charge a reasonable fee to cover the cost of providing other statements.
The administrator shall provide the statements within thirty days after the
participant or beneficiary's request or, if a fee is charged, within thirty
days after receiving payment.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
42. REPORTS TO AGENCY. An
administrator shall file with the department of retirement systems a copy of:

(1) The governing law
of the retirement program and system within four months after the system
becomes subject to this subchapter and an updated copy at least once every year
thereafter;

(2) The summary plan
description within four months after the system becomes subject to this
subchapter and of updated summary plan descriptions at the same time they are
first furnished to any participant or beneficiary under section 41(1)(c) of
this act;

(3) Any summary
description of modifications or changes within seven months after the end of
the fiscal year in which a modification or change has been made; and

(4) The annual
disclosure of financial and actuarial status and annual report within seven
months after the end of each fiscal year.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
43. SUMMARY PLAN DESCRIPTION.
(1) A summary plan description and a summary description of modifications or
changes under section 40(1)(b) of this act must be written in a manner
calculated to be understood by the average participant and be accurate and sufficiently
comprehensive reasonably to inform the participants and beneficiaries of their
rights and obligations under the retirement program.

(2) A summary plan
description must contain:

(a) The name of the
retirement program and system and type of administration;

(b) The name and
business address of the administrator;

(c) The name and
business address of each agent for service of process;

(d) Citations to the
governing law of the retirement program and system;

(e) A description of
the program's requirements respecting eligibility for participation and
benefits;

(f) A description of
the program's provisions providing for nonforfeitable benefits;

(g) A description of
circumstances that may result in disqualification, ineligibility, or denial or
loss of benefits;

(h) A description of
the benefits provided by the program, including the manner of calculating
benefits and any benefits provided for spouses and survivors;

(i) The source of
financing for the program;

(j) The identity of any
organization through which benefits are provided;

(k) The date the fiscal
year ends;

(l) The procedures to
claim benefits under the program and the administrative procedures available
under the program for the redress of claims that are denied in whole or in
part; and

(m) Notice of the
availability of additional information pursuant to sections 40 (2) and (3), 41
(2) and (3), and 42 of this act.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
44. ANNUAL DISCLOSURE OF
FINANCIAL AND ACTUARIAL STATUS. (1) As used in this section, "qualified
public accountant" means:

(a) An auditing agency
of this state, or a political subdivision of this state, which has no direct
relationship with the functions or activities of a retirement system or its
fiduciaries other than:

(i) Functions relating
to this subchapter; or

(ii) A relationship
between the system and the agency's employees as participants or beneficiaries
on the same basis as other participants and beneficiaries; or

(b) A person who is an
independent public accountant, certified or licensed by a regulatory authority
of a state.

(2) As used in this
section, "related person" of an individual means:

(a) The individual's
spouse or a parent or sibling of the spouse;

(b) The individual's
descendant, sibling, or parent, or the spouse of the individual's descendant,
sibling, or parent;

(c) Another individual
residing in the same household as the individual;

(d) A trust or estate
in which an individual described in (a) through (c) of this subsection has a
substantial interest;

(e) A trust or estate
for which the individual has fiduciary responsibilities; or

(f) An incompetent,
ward, or minor for whom the individual has fiduciary responsibilities.

(3) An annual
disclosure of financial and actuarial status must contain:

(a) The name of the
retirement system and identification of each retirement program and, if
programs are in an appropriate grouping of programs, of each appropriate
grouping of programs;

(b) The name and
business address of the administrator;

(c) The name and
business address of each trustee and each member of a board of trustees and a
brief description of how the trustee or member was selected;

(d) The name and
business address of each agent for service of process;

(e) The number of
employees covered by each retirement program not in an appropriate grouping of
programs, or by each appropriate grouping of programs, or both;

(f) The name and
business address of each fiduciary;

(g) The current
statement of investment objectives and policies required by section 35(2) of
this act;

(h) Financial
statements and notes to the financial statements in conformity with generally
accepted accounting principles;

(i) An opinion on the
financial statements by a qualified public accountant in conformity with
generally accepted auditing standards;

(j) In the case of a
defined benefit plan, actuarial schedules and notes to the actuarial schedules
in conformity with generally accepted actuarial principles and practices for
measuring pension obligations;

(k) In the case of a
defined benefit plan, an opinion by a qualified actuary that the actuarial
schedules are complete and accurate to the best of the actuary's knowledge,
that each assumption and method used in preparing the schedules is reasonable,
that the assumptions and methods in the aggregate are reasonable, and that the
assumptions and methods in combination offer the actuary's best estimate of
anticipated experience;

(l) A description of
any material interest, other than the interest in the retirement program
itself, held by any public employer participating in the system or any employee
organization representing employees covered by the system in any material transaction
with the system within the last three years or proposed to be effected;

(m) A description of
any material interest held by any trustee, administrator, or employee who is a
fiduciary with respect to the investment and management of assets of the
system, and, if the fiduciary is an individual, by a related person of the
beneficiary, in any material transaction with the system within the last three
years or proposed to be effected;

(n) A schedule of the
rates of return, net of total investment expense, on assets of the system
overall and on assets aggregated by category over the most recent one-year,
three-year, five-year, and ten‑year periods, to the extent available, and
the rates of return on appropriate benchmarks for assets of the system overall
and for each category over each period;

(o) A schedule of the
sum of total investment expense and total general administrative expense for
the fiscal year expressed as a percentage of the fair value of assets of the
system on the last day of the fiscal year, and an equivalent percentage for the
preceding five fiscal years; and

(p) A schedule of all
assets held for investment purposes on the last day of the fiscal year
aggregated and identified by issuer, borrower, lessor, or similar party to the
transaction stating, if relevant, the asset's maturity date, rate of interest,
par or maturity value, number of shares, cost, and fair value and identifying
any asset that is in default or classified as uncollectible.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
45. ANNUAL REPORT. An annual
report must contain:

(1) The name and
business address of each trustee and each member of a board of trustees;

(2) The financial
statements, but not the notes, required by section 44(3)(h) of this act;

(3) For defined benefit
plans, the actuarial schedules, but not the notes, required by section 44(3)(j)
of this act;

(4) The schedules
described in section 44(3) (n) and (o) of this act;

(5) A brief description
of and information about how to interpret the statements and schedules;

(6) Other material
necessary to summarize fairly and accurately the annual disclosure of financial
and actuarial status; and

(7) Notice of the
availability of additional information pursuant to sections 40 (2) and (3), 41
(2) and (3), and 42 of this act.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
46. ENFORCEMENT. (1) A
public employer, participant, beneficiary, or fiduciary may maintain an action:

(a) To enjoin an act,
practice, or omission that violates this subchapter;

(b) For appropriate
equitable relief for breach of trust under section 38 of this act; or

(c) For other
appropriate equitable relief to redress the violation of or to enforce this
subchapter.

(2) The department of
retirement systems may maintain an action to enjoin a violation of section 42
of this act.

(3) In an action under
this section by a participant, beneficiary, or fiduciary, the court may award
reasonable attorneys' fees and costs to either party.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
47. STATUTE OF LIMITATIONS.
An action under section 46 of this act must be commenced within the period of
limitations in this state, if any, for actions for breach of trust or, if none,
within three years.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
48. ALIENATION OF BENEFITS.
Benefits of a retirement program may not be assigned or alienated and are
exempt from claims of creditors, except to the extent expressly permitted by
other law of this state.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
49. UNIFORMITY OF APPLICATION
AND CONSTRUCTION. In applying and construing this subchapter, consideration
must be given to the need to promote uniformity of the law with respect to its
subject among states that enact it.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
50. Captions and subchapter
headings used in this act are not any part of the law.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
51. Sections 1 through 14 and
27 through 49 of this act constitute a new chapter in Title 41 RCW. Sections 1
through 14 of this act are under subchapter heading "Pension Board."
Sections 27 through 49 of this act are under subchapter heading "Uniform
Management of Public Employee Retirement Systems."

NEW SECTION. Sec.
52. (1) Section 17 of this
act is necessary for the immediate preservation of the public peace, health, or
safety, or support of the state government and its existing public
institutions, and takes effect immediately.

(2) Sections 1 through
16 and 27 through 49 of this act take effect December 1, 2001.

(3) Section 19 of this
act takes effect March 1, 2002.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
53. Sections 18, 25, and 26
of this act expire March 1, 2002.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 54. If any provision of this
act or its application to any person or circumstance is held invalid, the
remainder of the act or the application of the provision to other persons or
circumstances is not affected.

---
END ---