BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF
WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1. RCW 41.31.010 and 1998 c
340 s 1 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) Beginning
January 1, 2003, and on January 1st of odd-numbered years thereafter, the
gain-sharing increase amount, if any, shall be used to provide a lump sum
payment to each plan 1 retiree under chapters 41.32 and 41.40 RCW. The
department shall calculate the amount of each payment as follows:

(a) Each plan 1
retiree is awarded one point for each year of service credit and each year of
retirement;

(b) The total gain-sharing
increase amount under RCW 41.31.020 is divided by the total number of points
awarded under (a) of this subsection;

(c) Each retiree's
individual point total is then multiplied by the single point value determined
under (b) of this subsection and that amount is the even year additional
payment.

(2)
Beginning July 1, 1998, and on January 1st of even-numbered years thereafter,
the annual increase amount as defined in RCW 41.32.010 and 41.40.010 shall be
increased by the gain-sharing increase amount, if any. The monthly retirement
allowance of a person in receipt of the benefit provided in RCW 41.32.489 or
41.40.197 shall immediately be adjusted to reflect any increase.

--- END ---