BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF
WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1. RCW 41.32.4851 and 1995
c 345 s 3 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) No one who ((becomes))
is a beneficiary under plan 1 after June 30, ((1995)) 2001,
shall receive a monthly retirement allowance of less than ((twenty-four))
fifty dollars ((and twenty-two cents)) times the number of years,
up to thirty years, of service creditable to the person whose service is
the basis of such retirement allowance.

(2) ((If the
retirement allowance payable was adjusted at the time benefit payments to the
beneficiary commenced, the minimum allowance provided in this section shall be
adjusted in a manner consistent with that adjustment.

(3))) Beginning July 1, ((1996)) 2002,
the minimum benefit set forth in subsection (1) of this section shall be
adjusted annually by the annual increase.

(((4))) (3)
Those receiving a temporary disability benefit under RCW 41.32.540 shall not be
eligible for the benefit provided by this section.

Sec. 2. RCW 41.40.1984 and 1995
c 345 s 7 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) Except as provided
in subsections (3) and (4) ((and (5))) of this section, no one
who ((becomes)) is a beneficiary after June 30, ((1995)) 2001,
shall receive a monthly retirement allowance of less than ((twenty-four))
fifty dollars ((and twenty-two cents)) times the number of years,
up to thirty years, of service creditable to the person whose service is
the basis of such retirement allowance.

(2) ((Where the
retirement allowance payable was adjusted at the time benefit payments to the
beneficiary commenced, the minimum allowance provided in this section shall be
adjusted in a manner consistent with that adjustment.

(3))) Beginning July 1, ((1996)) 2002,
the minimum benefit set forth in subsection (1) of this section shall be
adjusted annually by the annual increase.

(((4))) (3)
Those receiving a benefit under RCW 41.40.220(1) or under RCW 41.44.170 (3) and
(5) shall not be eligible for the benefit provided by this section.

(((5))) (4)
For persons who served as elected officials and whose accumulated employee
contributions and credited interest was less than seven hundred fifty dollars
at the time of retirement, the minimum benefit under subsection (1) of this
section shall be ten dollars per month per each year of creditable service.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 3. This act is necessary for
the immediate preservation of the public peace, health, or safety, or support
of the state government and its existing public institutions, and takes effect
July 1, 2001.

---
END ---