BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF
WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec.
1. The legislature finds
that the success of the state's education reform efforts are dependent on the
level of trust that parents, educators, community members, employers, and
students have in the components of the state's reform efforts. The legislature
also finds that teachers and parents must have confidence that the essential
academic learning requirements and the Washington assessment of student
learning are developmentally appropriate by grade level and that students can,
with skilled instruction and sufficient time on task, achieve the state's
learning standards for students of that grade. The legislature further finds
that parents and teachers must have confidence that student results on the
Washington assessment of student learning have been determined objectively and
accurately.

Therefore, the
legislature intends to direct the superintendent of public instruction to
institute a process designed to strengthen the level of confidence that
parents, teachers, community members, students, and other interested parties
have in the essential academic learning requirements and the Washington
assessment of student learning.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
2. A new section is added
to chapter 28A.655 RCW to read as follows:

(1) The superintendent
of public instruction shall create a separate advisory committee for each
Washington assessment of student learning in reading, mathematics, writing, and
when available, science. Each advisory committee shall review its assessment
to determine the assessment's developmental appropriateness for students at
that grade level, and shall report to the superintendent of public instruction
on any revisions to the assessment that need to occur to ensure that
well-taught students who have devoted enough time on task are able to meet
state academic standards as measured by that assessment. Each advisory
committee shall include, but need not be limited to teachers and other
educators, experts in child development, parents, and other interested
parties. Teachers shall comprise a majority of advisory committee membership.
Each advisory committee shall periodically report to the superintendent of
public instruction with its findings and recommendations. The superintendent
shall share those reports, and any resultant changes to the assessment, with
the governor, the education committees of the legislature, the academic
achievement and accountability commission, the state board of education, and
other interested parties.

(2) The
superintendent of public instruction shall use a portion of its summer
institutes and other professional development opportunities to help educators
learn to score the Washington assessment of student learning. School districts
are encouraged to provide ample opportunities for teachers and other educators
to learn to use and understand the scoring rubrics used to evaluate student
results on the Washington assessment of student learning.

---
END ---