BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF
WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec.
1. A new section is added
to chapter 28B.80 RCW to read as follows:

(1) The higher
education coordinating board shall offer conditional scholarships for full or
part-time studies that may be forgiven in exchange for teaching service in
Washington's public K-12 schools. Applicants must have a declared intention to
complete an approved preparation program leading to teacher certification with
an endorsement in math, science, technology, or bilingual education or be a
teacher who is seeking an additional endorsement in math, science, technology,
or bilingual education. Students are eligible to receive a conditional
scholarship not to exceed four thousand dollars for the 2001-02 academic year.
The higher education coordinating board may increase the maximum value of the
award in proportion to the increase of tuition and fees for a resident
undergraduate student at the University of Washington. Students are eligible
to receive conditional scholarships for a maximum of five years.

(2) When selecting
scholarship recipients, the higher education coordinating board shall give
priority to students who are bilingual and who are able to demonstrate their
dual language proficiency by meeting a standard established by the board. The
board shall establish the standard in consultation with the office of the
superintendent of public instruction's bilingual education advisory committee.
The board may also consider the applicant's demonstrated academic ability and
commitment to serve as a teacher within the state of Washington.

(3) Loans shall be
forgiven at the rate of one year of loan for two years of teaching service.
Recipients who teach in geographic or subject-matter shortage areas, as
specified by the office of the superintendent of public instruction, may have their
loans forgiven at the rate of one year of loan for one year of teaching
service.

(4) Recipients who fail
to fulfill the required teaching service shall be required to repay the
conditional loan with interest. The higher education coordinating board shall
define the terms for repayment, including applicable interest rates, fees, and
deferments, and may adopt other rules as necessary to implement this program.

(5)
Appropriations, private donations, or any other funds given to the higher
education coordinating board for this program, and all collections will be
deposited into the student loan account authorized in RCW 28B.102.060.

--- END ---