BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF
WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec.
1. The state of Washington
desires a skilled, dedicated, and well-trained work force for the community and
technical college system. The legislature finds that community and technical
colleges offer exceptional, cost-effective instructional programs to the
citizens of the state.

The legislature finds
that part-time academic employees at the community and technical colleges have
an essential role in providing students with a quality and affordable
education. Stagnated salaries and lack of career advancement opportunities
within the community college system are obstacles to part-time academic
employees. Low salaries also create a perception of unfairness. The
legislature further finds that part-time academic employees make major
contributions to student learning, program excellence, and to furthering the
community and technical college mission.

Therefore, it is the
intent of the legislature that part-time academic employees of community and
technical colleges receive fair compensation and employment opportunities.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
2. A new section is added
to chapter 28B.50 RCW to read as follows:

(1) To the extent funds
are available, part-time academic employees of community and technical colleges
shall receive proportional pay based on proportional duties, distributed in
equal amounts on a yearly basis until 2010 or until proportional pay has been
achieved. Proportional duties shall be determined by each institution through
the local decision-making process.

(2) Colleges, where
possible, shall increase the number of full-time faculty positions based on the
current workloads of their respective part-time academic employees.

(3) Unless the context
clearly requires otherwise, the definitions in this subsection apply throughout
this section.

(a) "Full-time
academic workload" has the definition in RCW 28B.50.489.

(b) "Part-time
academic employee" has the definition in RCW 28B.50.489.

(c) "Part-time
academic workload" has the definition in RCW 28B.50.489.

(d) "Proportional
pay" means payment at a rate based on calculating the hours worked by
part-time academic employees as a percentage of the part-time academic workload
to the full-time academic workload in a given discipline in a given
institution.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
3. A new section is added
to chapter 28B.50 RCW to read as follows:

(1) In order to assist
the legislature in making future decisions regarding part-time faculty issues
at the community and technical colleges, the state board for community and
technical colleges shall provide uniform data for each community and technical
college regarding part-time faculty on a yearly basis beginning with academic
year 1999. The data will include:

(a) The number of
part-time faculty who teach five credits or less on a continuing basis; the
number of part-time faculty who teach five to ten credits on a continuing
basis; and the number of part-time faculty who teach more than ten credits on a
continuing basis;

(b) The number of
faculty in each of the groups in (a) of this subsection who teach at more than
one community or technical college during an academic year and on a continuing
year-to-year basis;

(c) The number of
faculty who teach more than ten credits for two consecutive quarters that are
denied teaching contracts in a third quarter to avoid tenure.

(2) For
purposes of reporting to the legislature, the state board for community and
technical colleges shall determine a reporting name for each of the groups in
subsection (1)(a), (b), and (c) of this section.

---
END ---