BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF
WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec.
1. A new section is added
to chapter 43.20A RCW to read as follows:

A person
has a cause of action for damages against the department if the department
maintains in any of its records information pertaining to the person that the
department knows or reasonably should know is false or inaccurate and the use
or release of the false or inaccurate information causes injury to the person.
Damages that may be recovered include pecuniary damages and damages for
emotional distress and mental anguish.

--- END ---