BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF
WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1. RCW 47.56.030 and 1995
1st sp.s. c 4 s 1 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) The department
of transportation shall have full charge of the construction of all toll
bridges and other toll facilities including the Washington state ferries, and
the operation and maintenance thereof. The transportation commission shall
determine and establish the tolls and charges thereon, and shall perform all
duties and exercise all powers relating to the financing, refinancing, and
fiscal management of all toll bridges and other toll facilities including the
Washington state ferries, and bonded indebtedness in the manner provided by
law. The department shall have full charge of design of all toll facilities. Except
as provided in this section, the department shall proceed with the
construction of such toll bridges and other facilities and the approaches thereto
by contract in the manner of state highway construction immediately upon there
being made available funds for such work and shall prosecute such work to
completion as rapidly as practicable. The department is authorized to
negotiate contracts for any amount without bid under (a) and (b) of this
subsection:

(a) Emergency
contracts, in order to make repairs to ferries or ferry terminal facilities
or removal of such facilities whenever continued use of ferries or ferry
terminal facilities constitutes a real or immediate danger to the traveling
public or precludes prudent use of such ferries or facilities; and

(b) Single source
contracts for vessel dry dockings, when there is clearly and legitimately only
one available dry dock facility to conduct dry dock-related work for a specific
class or classes of vessels. The contracts may be entered into for a single
vessel dry docking or for multiple vessel dry dockings for a period not to
exceed two years.

(2) The
department shall proceed with the procurement of materials, supplies, services,
and equipment needed for the support, maintenance, and use of a ferry, ferry
terminal, or other facility operated by Washington state ferries, in accordance
with chapter 43.19 RCW except as follows:

(((1))) (a)
When the secretary of the department of transportation determines in writing
that the use of invitation for bid is either not practicable or not
advantageous to the state and it may be necessary to make competitive evaluations,
including technical or performance evaluations among acceptable proposals to
complete the contract award, a contract may be entered into by use of a
competitive sealed proposals method, and a formal request for proposals
solicitation. Such formal request for proposals solicitation shall include a
functional description of the needs and requirements of the state and the
significant factors.

(((2))) (b)
When purchases are made through a formal request for proposals solicitation the
contract shall be awarded to the responsible proposer whose competitive sealed
proposal is determined in writing to be the most advantageous to the state
taking into consideration price and other evaluation factors set forth in the
request for proposals. No significant factors may be used in evaluating a
proposal that are not specified in the request for proposals. Factors that may
be considered in evaluating proposals include but are not limited to: Price;
maintainability; reliability; commonality; performance levels; life cycle cost
if applicable under this section; cost of transportation or delivery; delivery
schedule offered; installation cost; cost of spare parts; availability of parts
and service offered; and the following:

(((a))) (i)
The ability, capacity, and skill of the proposer to perform the contract or
provide the service required;

(((b))) (ii)
The character, integrity, reputation, judgment, experience, and efficiency of
the proposer;

(((c))) (iii)
Whether the proposer can perform the contract within the time specified;

(((d))) (iv)
The quality of performance of previous contracts or services;

(((e))) (v)
The previous and existing compliance by the proposer with laws relating to the
contract or services;

(((f))) (vi)
Objective, measurable criteria defined in the request for proposal. These
criteria may include but are not limited to items such as discounts, delivery
costs, maintenance services costs, installation costs, and transportation
costs; and

(((g))) (vii)
Such other information as may be secured having a bearing on the decision to
award the contract.

(c) When
purchases are made through a request for proposal process, proposals received
shall be evaluated based on the evaluation factors set forth in the request for
proposal. When a life cycle cost analysis is used, the life cycle cost of a
proposal shall be given at least the same relative importance as the initial
price element specified in the request of proposal documents. The department
may reject any and all proposals received. If the proposals are not rejected,
the award shall be made to the proposer whose proposal is most advantageous to
the department, considering price and the other evaluation factors set forth in
the request for proposal.

(((3)
The legislative transportation committee shall review the secretary's use of
the request for proposals solicitation for Washington state ferries projects to
determine if the process established under chapter 4, Laws of 1995 1st sp.
sess. is appropriate. The results of the review, including recommendations for
modification of the request for proposal process, shall be reported to the
house of representatives and senate transportation committees by January 1,
1997.))

--- END ---