BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF
WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1. RCW 57.08.016 and 1999 c
153 s 5 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) There shall be no
private sale of real property where the appraised value exceeds the sum of two
thousand five hundred dollars. Subject to the provisions of subsection (2) of
this section, no real property of the district shall be sold for less than
ninety percent of the value thereof as established by a written appraisal made
not more than six months prior to the date of sale by ((three)) one
disinterested real estate broker((s)) licensed under the laws of the
state or one professionally designated real estate appraiser((s))
as defined in RCW 74.46.020. The appraisal shall be signed by the broker or
appraiser((s)) and filed with the secretary of the board of
commissioners of the district, who shall keep it at the office of the district
open to public inspection. Any notice of intention to sell real property of
the district shall recite the appraised value thereof.

(2) If no
purchasers can be obtained for the property at ninety percent or more of its
appraised value after one hundred twenty days of offering the property for
sale, the board of commissioners of the district may adopt a resolution stating
that the district has been unable to sell the property at the ninety percent amount.
The district then may sell the property at the highest price it can obtain at
public auction. A notice of intention to sell at public auction shall be
published once a week for two consecutive weeks in a newspaper of general
circulation in the district. The notice shall describe the property, state the
time and place at which it will be offered for sale and the terms of sale, and
shall call for bids, fix the conditions thereof, and reserve the right to
reject any and all bids for good cause.

--- END ---