BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF
WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1. RCW 39.80.040 and 1981 c
61 s 4 are each amended to read as follows:

In the
procurement of architectural and engineering services, the agency shall
encourage firms engaged in the lawful practice of their profession to submit ((annually)),
no less than biennially, a statement of qualifications and performance
data. The agency shall evaluate current statements of qualifications and
performance data on file with the agency, together with those that may be
submitted by other firms regarding the proposed project, and shall conduct
discussions with one or more firms regarding anticipated concepts and the
relative utility of alternative methods of approach for furnishing the required
services and then shall select therefrom, based upon criteria established by
the agency, the firm deemed to be the most highly qualified to provide the
services required for the proposed project. Such agency procedures and
guidelines shall include a plan to insure that minority and women-owned firms
are afforded the maximum practicable opportunity to compete for and obtain
public contracts for services. The level of participation by minority and
women-owned firms shall be consistent with their general availability within
the professional communities involved.

--- END ---