BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF
WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1. RCW 57.46.010 and 1996 c
230 s 1401 are each amended to read as follows:

A
district may engage in general fund-raising activities for the purpose of
enhancing contributions to assistance programs described in this section.
A district may also include along with, or as part of its regular
customer billings, a request for voluntary contributions to assist qualified
low-income residential customers of the district in paying their district
bills. All funds received by the district in response to such requests shall
be transmitted to the grantee of the department of community, trade, and
economic development which administers federally funded energy assistance
programs for the state in the district's service area or to a charitable
organization within the district's service area. All such funds shall be used
solely to supplement assistance to low-income residential customers of the
district in paying their district bills. The grantee or charitable
organization shall be responsible to determine which of the district's
customers are qualified for low-income assistance and the amount of assistance
to be provided to those who are qualified.

--- END ---