BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF
WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec.
1. A new section is added
to chapter 36.70A RCW to read as follows:

(1) Churches and
private schools shall not be considered urban growth. For purposes of this
chapter a church is a structure operated by a nonprofit religious organization
for religious worship or related administrative, educational, eleemosynary, and
social activities, and a private school is any school regulated under chapter 28A.195
RCW.

(2) The
comprehensive plan and development regulations of each county and city that
plans under this chapter shall include a process for siting churches and
private schools, as defined in this section.

--- END ---