BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF
WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec.
1. It is the intent of the
legislature, through the provisions of this act, to clarify existing law.
Namely, the intent of the legislature is to clarify that water discharge
permits issued by the department of ecology contain a permit shield consistent
with the federal water pollution control act.

Sec. 2. RCW 90.48.160 and 1989 c
293 s 2 are each amended to read as follows:

Any person who conducts
a commercial or industrial operation of any type which results in the disposal
of solid or liquid waste material into the waters of the state, including
commercial or industrial operators discharging solid or liquid waste material
into sewerage systems operated by municipalities or public entities which
discharge into public waters of the state, shall procure a permit from either
the department or the ((thermal power plant)) energy facility
site evaluation council as provided in RCW 90.48.262(2) before disposing of
such waste material: PROVIDED, That this section shall not apply to any person
discharging domestic sewage only into a sewerage system.

Compliance with a
permit issued under this section is deemed compliance with this chapter. The
department must incorporate this permit shield into any individual, general, or
group permits and permitting programs developed by the department under this
section. The department may reopen and modify a discharge permit where the
permitted activity causes exceedances of water quality standards, after
allowing for appropriate dilution. However, discharge permits may not contain
conditions or limitations creating liability for exceedances of water quality
standards caused by discharges otherwise in compliance with all conditions of
the permit.

The department may,
through the adoption of rules, eliminate the permit requirements for disposing
of wastes into publicly operated sewerage systems for:

(1) Categories of or
individual municipalities or public corporations operating sewerage systems; or

(2) Any category of
waste disposer;

if the department
determines such permit requirements are no longer necessary for the effective
implementation of this chapter. The department may by rule eliminate the
permit requirements for disposing of wastes by upland finfish rearing
facilities unless a permit is required under the federal clean water act's
national pollutant discharge elimination system.

Sec. 3. RCW 90.48.180 and 1987 c
109 s 137 are each amended to read as follows:

The department shall
issue a permit unless it finds that the disposal of waste material as proposed
in the application will pollute the waters of the state in violation of the
public policy declared in RCW 90.48.010. The department shall have authority
to specify conditions necessary to avoid such pollution in each permit under
which waste material may be disposed of by the permittee. Permits may be
temporary or permanent but shall not be valid for more than five years from
date of issuance.

Compliance with a
permit issued under this section is deemed compliance with this chapter and is
deemed compliance with the federal clean water act, except as specifically
limited by 33 U.S.C. Sec. 1342(k). The department must incorporate this permit
shield into any individual, general, or group permits or permitting programs
developed by the department under this section. The department may reopen and
modify a discharge permit where the permitted activity causes exceedances of
water quality standards, after allowing for appropriate dilution. However,
discharge permits may not contain conditions or limitations creating liability
for exceedances of water quality standards caused by discharges otherwise in
compliance with all conditions of the permit.

Sec. 4. RCW 90.48.260 and 1988 c
220 s 1 are each amended to read as follows:

The department of
ecology is hereby designated as the State Water Pollution Control Agency for
all purposes of the federal clean water act as it exists on February 4, 1987,
and is hereby authorized to participate fully in the programs of the act as
well as to take all action necessary to secure to the state the benefits and to
meet the requirements of that act. With regard to the national estuary program
established by section 320 of that act, the department shall exercise its
responsibility jointly with the Puget Sound ((water quality authority)) action
team. The powers granted herein include, among others, and notwithstanding
any other provisions of chapter 90.48 RCW or otherwise, the following:

(1) Complete authority
to establish and administer a comprehensive state point source waste discharge
or pollution discharge elimination permit program which will enable the
department to qualify for full participation in any national waste discharge or
pollution discharge elimination permit system and will allow the department to
be the sole agency issuing permits required by such national system operating
in the state of Washington subject to the provisions of RCW 90.48.262(2).
Program elements authorized herein may include, but are not limited to: (a)
Effluent treatment and limitation requirements together with timing
requirements related thereto; (b) applicable receiving water quality standards
requirements; (c) requirements of standards of performance for new sources; (d)
pretreatment requirements; (e) termination and modification of permits for
cause; (f) requirements for public notices and opportunities for public
hearings; (g) appropriate relationships with the secretary of the army in the
administration of ((his)) the secretary's responsibilities which
relate to anchorage and navigation, with the administrator of the environmental
protection agency in the performance of his duties, and with other governmental
officials under the federal clean water act; (h) requirements for inspection,
monitoring, entry, and reporting; (i) enforcement of the program through
penalties, emergency powers, and criminal sanctions; (j) a continuing planning
process; and (k) user charges.

(2) The power to
establish and administer state programs in a manner which will ((insure))
ensure the procurement of moneys, whether in the form of grants, loans,
or otherwise; to assist in the construction, operation, and maintenance of
various water pollution control facilities and works; and the administering of
various state water pollution control management, regulatory, and enforcement
programs.

(3) The power to
develop and implement appropriate programs pertaining to continuing planning
processes, areawide waste treatment management plans, and basin planning.

Compliance with a
permit issued under this section is deemed compliance with this chapter and is
deemed compliance with the federal clean water act, except as specifically
limited by 33 U.S.C. Sec. 1342(k). The department must incorporate this permit
shield into any individual, general, or group permit or permitting programs
developed by the department under this section. The department may reopen and
modify a discharge permit where the permitted activity causes exceedances of
water quality standards, after allowing for appropriate dilution. However,
discharge permits may not contain conditions or limitations creating liability
for exceedances of water quality standards caused by discharges otherwise in
compliance with all conditions of the permit.

The
governor shall have authority to perform those actions required of him or her
by the federal clean water act.

---
END ---