BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF
WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1. RCW 54.04.082 and 1995 c
354 s 1 are each amended to read as follows:

For the awarding of a
contract to purchase any item, or items of the same kind of materials,
equipment, or supplies in an amount exceeding ((five)) ten
thousand dollars, but less than ((thirty-five)) fifty thousand
dollars, exclusive of sales tax, the commission may, in lieu of the procedure
described in RCW 54.04.070 and 54.04.080 requiring public notice to invite
sealed proposals for such materials, equipment, or supplies, pursuant to
commission resolution use the process provided in RCW 39.04.190. Waiver of the
deposit or bid bond required under RCW 54.04.080 may be authorized by the commission
in securing such bid quotations.

Sec. 2. RCW 54.04.070 and 2000 c
138 s 211 are each amended to read as follows:

Any item, or items of
the same kind of materials, equipment, or supplies purchased, the estimated
cost of which is in excess of ((five)) ten thousand dollars,
exclusive of sales tax shall be by contract: PROVIDED, That a district may
make purchases of the same kind of items of materials, equipment and supplies
not exceeding five thousand dollars in any calendar month without a contract,
purchasing any excess thereof over five thousand dollars by contract. Any work
ordered by a district commission, the estimated cost of which is in excess of
ten thousand dollars exclusive of sales tax, shall be by contract, except that
a district commission may have its own regularly employed personnel perform
work which is an accepted industry practice under prudent utility management
without a contract. Prudent utility management means performing work with
regularly employed personnel utilizing material of a worth not exceeding fifty
thousand dollars in value without a contract: PROVIDED, That such limit on the
value of material being utilized in work being performed by regularly employed
personnel shall not include the value of individual items of equipment
purchased or acquired and used as one unit of a project. Before awarding such
a contract, the commission shall publish a notice once or more in a newspaper
of general circulation in the district at least thirteen days before the last
date upon which bids will be received, inviting sealed proposals for the work
or materials; plans and specifications of which shall at the time of the
publication be on file at the office of the district subject to public
inspection. Any published notice ordering work to be performed for the
district shall be mailed at the time of publication to any established trade
association which files a written request with the district to receive such
notices. The commission may at the same time and as part of the same notice,
invite tenders for the work or materials upon plans and specifications to be
submitted by the bidders.

All contract projects
equal to or in excess of one hundred thousand dollars shall be let by
competitive bidding unless the public utility district lets contracts using the
small works roster process under RCW 39.04.155.

Whenever equipment or
materials required by a district are held by a governmental agency and are
available for sale but such agency is unwilling to submit a proposal, the
commission may ascertain the price of such items and file a statement of such
price supported by the sworn affidavit of one member of the commission and may
consider such price as a bid without a deposit or bond.

The
commission may waive the competitive bidding requirements of this section
pursuant to RCW 39.04.280 if an exemption contained within that section applies
to the purchase or public work.

---
END ---