BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF
WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec.
1. It is the intent of the
legislature to allow public utility districts to enter into joint agreements
with other public and private entities to own and operate electric generation
facilities.

Sec. 2. RCW 54.44.010 and
1975-'76 2nd ex.s. c 72 s 1 are each amended to read as follows:

It is declared to be in
the public interest and for a public purpose that cities of the first class,
public utility districts, joint operating agencies organized under chapter
43.52 RCW, ((regulated electrical companies)) port districts,
irrigation districts, sewer districts, water districts, and((,))
rural electrical cooperatives including generation and transmission
cooperatives, investor-owned utilities, private nonutility power plant
developers and operators, commercial or industrial customers of any public
utility owning a plant under authority of this chapter, and direct service
industrial customers of the Bonneville power administration be permitted to
participate together in the development of nuclear and other ((thermal))
electric power facilities and transmission facilities as hereinafter
provided as one means of achieving economies of scale and thereby promoting the
economic development of the state and its natural resources to meet the future
power needs of the state and all its inhabitants.

Sec. 3. RCW 54.44.020 and 1997 c
230 s 2 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) Except as provided
in subsection (2) of this section, cities of the first class, public utility
districts organized under chapter 54.08 RCW, and joint operating agencies
organized under chapter 43.52 RCW, any such cities and public utility districts
which operate electric generating facilities or distribution systems and any
joint operating agency shall have power and authority to participate and enter
into agreements with each other and with ((electrical companies which are
subject to the jurisdiction of the Washington utilities and transportation
commission or the public utility commissioner of Oregon, hereinafter called
"regulated utilities", and with)) port districts, irrigation
districts, water-sewer districts, entities formed under chapter 39.34 RCW,
investor-owned utilities, rural electric cooperatives, including generation
and transmission cooperatives, private nonutility developers and operators
including affiliates of regulated utilities, direct service industrial
customers of the Bonneville power administration, and any commercial or
industrial customer of any utility participating in a joint ownership under
this chapter for the undivided ownership of any type of electric generating
plants and facilities, including, but not limited to nuclear and other thermal
power generating plants and facilities and transmission facilities including,
but not limited to, related transmission facilities, hereinafter called
"common facilities", and for the planning, financing, acquisition,
construction, operation and maintenance thereof. It shall be provided in such
agreements that each city, public utility district, or joint operating agency
shall own a percentage of any common facility equal to the percentage of the money
furnished or the value of property supplied by it for the acquisition and
construction thereof and shall own and control a like percentage of the
electrical output thereof.

(2) Cities of the first
class, public utility districts organized under chapter 54.08 RCW, and joint
operating agencies organized under chapter 43.52 RCW, shall have the power and
authority to participate and enter into agreements for the undivided ownership
of a coal-fired thermal electric generating plant and facility placed in operation
before July 1, 1975, including related common facilities, and for the planning,
financing, acquisition, construction, operation, and maintenance of the plant
and facility. It shall be provided in such agreements that each city, public
utility district, or joint operating agency shall own a percentage of any
common facility equal to the percentage of the money furnished or the value of
property supplied by the city, district, or agency, for the acquisition and
construction of the facility and shall own and control a like percentage of the
electrical output thereof. Cities of the first class, public utility
districts, and joint operating agencies may enter into agreements under this
subsection with each other, with regulated utilities, with rural electric
cooperatives, with electric companies subject to the jurisdiction of the
regulatory commission of any other state, and with any power marketer subject
to the jurisdiction of the federal energy regulatory commission.

(3) Each participant
shall defray its own interest and other payments required to be made or
deposited in connection with any financing undertaken by it to pay its
percentage of the money furnished or value of property supplied by it for the
planning, acquisition and construction of any common facility, or any additions
or betterments thereto. The agreement shall provide a uniform method of
determining and allocating operation and maintenance expenses of the common
facility.

(4) Each ((city,
public utility district, joint operating agency, regulated utility, and
cooperatives)) participant participating in the ownership or
operation of a common facility shall pay all taxes chargeable to its share of
the common facility and the electric energy generated thereby under applicable
statutes as now or hereafter in effect, and may make payments during
preliminary work and construction for any increased financial burden suffered
by any county or other existing taxing district in the county in which the
common facility is located, pursuant to agreement with such county or taxing
district.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 4. If any provision of this
act or its application to any person or circumstance is held invalid, the
remainder of the act or the application of the provision to other persons or
circumstances is not affected.

---
END ---