BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF
WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec.
1. The legislature intends
to enable the Washington state ferry system to authorize other entities to sell
tickets and medium for passage on Washington state ferries. This will increase
convenience for customers and help reduce congestion at ferry ticket booths.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
2. A new section is added
to chapter 47.60 RCW to read as follows:

(1) The department may
enter into contracts with private vendors to sell ferry tickets and medium at
locations other than Washington state ferry terminals or facilities. The
department may enter into the contracts only:

(a) With private
vendors that are already established businesses offering goods for sale to the
general public; and

(b) If it determines
that the vendor's established location has the potential to serve a significant
percentage of the customers using a particular ferry route.

(2) The
department may adopt necessary rules and procedures to allow the use of credit
and debit cards to purchase ferry tickets or medium from a private vendor who
has contracted with the department to sell ferry tickets or medium. The
department may establish a convenience fee to be paid by the credit or debit
card user whenever a credit or debit card is chosen as the payment method. The
convenience fee must be sufficient to offset the charges imposed on the
department by the credit and debit card companies. In no event may the use of
credit or debit cards authorized by this section create a loss of revenue to
the state. The use of a personal credit card does not rely upon the credit of
the state as prohibited by Article VIII, section 5 of the state Constitution.

---
END ---