BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF
WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1. RCW 76.13.110 and 2000 c
11 s 12 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) The department of
natural resources shall establish and maintain a small forest landowner
office. The small forest landowner office shall be a resource and focal point
for small forest landowner concerns and policies, and shall have significant
expertise regarding the management of small forest holdings, governmental
programs applicable to such holdings, and the forestry riparian easement
program.

(2) The small forest
landowner office shall administer the provisions of the forestry riparian
easement program created under RCW 76.13.120. With respect to that program,
the office shall have the authority to contract with private consultants that
the office finds qualified to perform timber cruises of forestry riparian
easements or to lay out streamside buffers and comply with other forest and
fish regulatory requirements related to the forest riparian easement program.

(3) The small forest
landowner office shall assist in the development of small landowner options
through alternate management plans or alternate harvest restrictions
appropriate to small landowners. The small forest landowner office shall
develop criteria to be adopted by the forest practices board in rules and
a manual for alternate management plans or alternate harvest restrictions.
These alternate plans or alternate harvest restrictions shall meet riparian
functions while requiring less costly regulatory prescriptions. At the
landowner's option, alternate plans or alternate harvest restrictions may be
used to further meet riparian functions.

The small forest
landowner office shall evaluate the cumulative impact of such alternate
management plans or alternate harvest restrictions on essential riparian
functions at the subbasin or watershed level. The small forest landowner
office shall adjust future alternate management plans or alternate harvest
restrictions in a manner that will minimize the negative impacts on essential
riparian functions within a subbasin or watershed.

(4) An advisory
committee is established to assist the small forest landowner office in
developing policy and recommending rules to the forest practices board. The
advisory committee shall consist of seven members, including a representative
from the department of ecology, the department of fish and wildlife, and a
tribal representative. Four additional committee members shall be small forest
landowners who shall be appointed by the commissioner of public lands from a
list of candidates submitted by the board of directors of the Washington farm
forestry association or its successor organization. The association shall
submit more than one candidate for each position. Appointees shall serve for a
term of four years. The small forest landowner office shall review draft rules
or rule concepts with the committee prior to recommending such rules to the
forest practices board. The office shall reimburse nongovernmental committee
members for reasonable expenses associated with attending committee meetings as
provided in RCW 43.03.050 and 43.03.060.

(5) By December 1, ((2000))
2002, the small forest landowner office shall provide a report to the
board and the legislature containing:

(a) Estimates of the
amounts of nonindustrial forests and woodlands in holdings of twenty acres or
less, twenty-one to one hundred acres, one hundred to one thousand acres, and
one thousand to five thousand acres, in western Washington and eastern
Washington, and the number of persons having total nonindustrial forest and
woodland holdings in those size ranges;

(b) Estimates of the
number of parcels of nonindustrial forests and woodlands held in contiguous
ownerships of twenty acres or less, and the percentages of those parcels
containing improvements used: (i) As primary residences for half or more of
most years; (ii) as vacation homes or other temporary residences for less than
half of most years; and (iii) for other uses;

(c) The watershed
administrative units in which significant portions of the riparian areas or
total land area are nonindustrial forests and woodlands;

(d) Estimates of the
number of forest practices applications and notifications filed per year for
forest road construction, silvicultural activities to enhance timber growth,
timber harvest not associated with conversion to nonforest land uses, with
estimates of the number of acres of nonindustrial forests and woodlands on
which forest practices are conducted under those applications and notifications;
and

(e) Recommendations on
ways the board and the legislature could provide more effective incentives to
encourage continued management of nonindustrial forests and woodlands for
forestry uses in ways that better protect salmon, other fish and wildlife,
water quality, and other environmental values.

(6) By December 1, ((2002))
2004, and every four years thereafter, the small forest landowner office
shall provide to the board and the legislature an update of the report
described in subsection (5) of this section, containing more recent information
and describing:

(a) Trends in the items
estimated under subsection (5)(a) through (d) of this section;

(b) Whether, how, and
to what extent the forest practices act and rules contributed to those trends;
and

(c) Whether, how, and
to what extent: (i) The board and legislature implemented recommendations made
in the previous report; and (ii) implementation of or failure to implement
those recommendations affected those trends.

Sec. 2. RCW 76.13.120 and 2000 c
11 s 13 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) The legislature
finds that the state should acquire easements along riparian and other
sensitive aquatic areas from small forest landowners willing to sell or donate
such easements to the state provided that the state will not be required to
acquire such easements if they are subject to unacceptable liabilities. The
legislature therefore establishes a forestry riparian easement program.

(2) The definitions in
this subsection apply throughout this section and RCW 76.13.100 and 76.13.110
unless the context clearly requires otherwise.

(a) "Forestry
riparian easement" means an easement covering qualifying timber granted
voluntarily to the state by a small forest landowner.

(b) "Qualifying
timber" means those trees covered by a forest practices application that
the small forest landowner is required to leave unharvested under the rules
adopted under RCW 76.09.055 and 76.09.370 or that is made uneconomic to harvest
by those rules, and for which the small landowner is willing to grant the state
a forestry riparian easement. "Qualifying timber" is timber within
or bordering a commercially reasonable harvest unit as determined under rules
adopted by the forest practices board, or timber for which an approved
forest practices application for timber harvest cannot be obtained because of
restrictions under the forest practices rules.

(c) "Small forest
landowner" means a landowner meeting all of the following characteristics:
(i) A forest landowner as defined in RCW 76.09.020 whose interest in the land
and timber is in fee or who has rights to the timber to be included in the
forestry riparian easement that extend at least fifty years from the date the
forest practices application associated with the easement is submitted; (ii) an
entity that has harvested from its own lands in this state during the three
years prior to the year of application an average timber volume that would
qualify the owner as a small timber harvester under RCW 84.33.073(1); and (iii)
an entity that certifies at the time of application that it does not expect to
harvest from its own lands more than the volume allowed by RCW 84.33.073(1)
during the ten years following application. If a landowner's prior three-year
average harvest exceeds the limit of RCW 84.33.073(1), or the landowner expects
to exceed this limit during the ten years following application, and that
landowner establishes to the department of natural resources' reasonable satisfaction
that the harvest limits were or will be exceeded to raise funds to pay estate
taxes or equally compelling and unexpected obligations such as court-ordered
judgments or extraordinary medical expenses, the landowner shall be deemed to
be a small forest landowner.

For purposes of
determining whether a person qualifies as a small forest landowner, the small
forest landowner office, created in RCW 76.13.110, shall evaluate the landowner
under this definition as of the date that the forest practices application is
submitted or the date the landowner notifies the department that the harvest
is to begin with which the forestry riparian easement is associated. A
small forest landowner can include an individual, partnership, corporate, or
other nongovernmental legal entity. If a landowner grants timber rights to
another entity for less than five years, the landowner may still qualify as a
small forest landowner under this section. If a landowner is unable to
obtain an approved forest practices application for timber harvest for any of
his or her land because of restrictions under the forest practices rules, the
landowner may still qualify as a small forest landowner under this section.

(d) "Completion of
harvest" means that the trees have been harvested from an area and that
further entry into that area by mechanized logging or slash treating equipment
is not expected.

(3) The department of
natural resources is authorized and directed to accept and hold in the name of
the state of Washington forestry riparian easements granted by small forest
landowners covering qualifying timber and to pay compensation to such
landowners in accordance with subsections (6) and (7) of this section. The
department of natural resources may not transfer the easements to any entity
other than another state agency.

(4) Forestry riparian
easements shall be effective for fifty years from the date the forest practices
application associated with the qualifying timber is submitted to the
department of natural resources, unless the easement is terminated earlier by
the department of natural resources voluntarily, based on a determination that
termination is in the best interest of the state, or under the terms of a
termination clause in the easement.

(5) Forestry riparian
easements shall be restrictive only, and shall preserve all lawful uses of the
easement premises by the landowner that are consistent with the terms of the
easement and the requirement to protect riparian functions during the term of
the easement, subject to the restriction that the leave trees required by the
rules to be left on the easement premises may not be cut during the term of the
easement. No right of public access to or across, or any public use of the
easement premises is created by this statute or by the easement. Forestry
riparian easements shall not be deemed to trigger the compensating tax of or
otherwise disqualify land from being taxed under chapter 84.33 or 84.34 RCW.

(6) Upon application of
a small forest landowner for a riparian easement that is associated with a
forest practices application and the landowner's marking of the qualifying
timber on the qualifying lands, the small forest landowner office shall
determine the compensation to be offered to the small forest landowner as
provided for in this section. The small forest landowner office shall also
determine the compensation to be offered to a small forest landowner for
qualifying timber for which an approved forest practices application for timber
harvest cannot be obtained because of restrictions under the forest practices
rules. The legislature recognizes that there is not readily available
market transaction evidence of value for easements of this nature, and thus
establishes the following methodology to ascertain the value for forestry riparian
easements. Values so determined shall not be considered competent evidence of
value for any other purpose.

The small forest
landowner office shall establish the volume of the qualifying timber. Based on
that volume and using data obtained or maintained by the department of revenue
under RCW 84.33.074 and 84.33.091, the small forest landowner office shall
attempt to determine the fair market value of the qualifying timber as of the
date the forest practices application associated with the qualifying timber was
submitted. If, under the forest practices rules adopted under chapter 4, Laws
of 1999 sp. sess., some qualifying timber may be removed prior to the
expiration of the fifty-year term of the easement, the small forest landowner
office shall apply a reduced compensation factor to ascertain the value of
those trees based on the proportional economic value, considering income and
growth, lost to the landowner.

(7) Except as provided
in subsection (8) of this section, the small forest landowner office shall,
subject to available funding, offer compensation to the small forest landowner
in the amount of fifty percent of the value determined in subsection (6) of
this section, plus the compliance costs as determined in accordance with
section 4 of this act. If the landowner accepts the offer for
qualifying timber that will be harvested pursuant to an approved forest
practices application, the department of natural resources shall pay the
compensation promptly upon (a) completion of harvest in the area covered by the
forestry riparian easement; (b) verification that there has been compliance
with the rules requiring leave trees in the easement area; and (c) execution
and delivery of the easement to the department of natural resources. If the
landowner accepts the offer for qualifying timber for which an approved forest
practices application for timber harvest cannot be obtained because of
restrictions under the forest practices rules, the department of natural
resources shall pay the compensation promptly upon (i) verification that there
has been compliance with the rules requiring leave trees in the easement area;
and (ii) execution and delivery of the easement to the department of natural
resources. Upon donation or payment of compensation, the department of
natural resources may record the easement.

(8) For approved forest
practices applications where the regulatory impact is greater than the average
percentage impact for all small landowners as determined by the department of
natural resources analysis under the regulatory fairness act, chapter 19.85
RCW, the compensation offered will be increased to one hundred percent for that
portion of the regulatory impact that is in excess of the average. Regulatory
impact includes trees left in buffers, special management zones, and those
rendered uneconomic to harvest by these rules. A separate average or high
impact regulatory threshold shall be established for western and eastern
Washington. Criteria for these measurements and payments shall be established
by the small forest landowner office.

(9) The forest
practices board shall adopt rules under the administrative procedure act,
chapter 34.05 RCW, to implement the forestry riparian easement program,
including the following:

(a) A standard version
or versions of all documents necessary or advisable to create the forestry
riparian easements as provided for in this section;

(b) Standards for
descriptions of the easement premises with a degree of precision that is
reasonable in relation to the values involved;

(c) Methods and
standards for cruises and valuation of forestry riparian easements for purposes
of establishing the compensation. The department of natural resources shall
perform the timber cruises of forestry riparian easements required under this
chapter and chapter 76.09 RCW. Any rules concerning the methods and standards
for valuations of forestry riparian easements shall apply only to the
department of natural resources, small forest landowners, and the small forest
landowner office;

(d) A method to
determine that a forest practices application involves a commercially
reasonable harvest, and adopt criteria for entering into a forest riparian
easement where a commercially reasonable harvest is not possible or a forest
practices application that has been submitted cannot be approved because of
restrictions under the forest practices rules;

(e) A method to address
blowdown of qualified timber falling outside the easement premises;

(f) A formula for
sharing of proceeds in relation to the acquisition of qualified timber covered
by an easement through the exercise or threats of eminent domain by a federal
or state agency with eminent domain authority, based on the present value of
the department of natural resources' and the landowner's relative interests in
the qualified timber;

(g) High impact
regulatory thresholds;

(h) A method to
determine timber that is qualifying timber because it is rendered uneconomic to
harvest by the rules adopted under RCW 76.09.055 and 76.09.370; and

(i) A method for
internal department of natural resources review of small forest landowner
office compensation decisions under subsection (7) of this section.

Sec. 3. RCW 76.13.130 and 1999
sp.s. c 4 s 505 are each amended to read as follows:

On parcels of twenty
contiguous acres or less, landowners with a total parcel ownership of less than
eighty acres shall not be required to leave riparian buffers adjacent to
streams according to forest practices rules adopted under the forests and fish
report as defined in RCW 76.09.020. These landowners shall be subject to the
permanent forest practices rules in effect as of January 1, 1999, but may
additionally be required to leave timber adjacent to streams that is equivalent
to no greater than fifteen percent of a volume of timber contained in a stand
of well managed fifty-year old commercial timber covering the harvest area.
The additional fifteen percent leave tree level shall be computed as a rotating
stand volume and shall be regulated through flexible forest practices as the
stream buffer is managed over time to meet riparian functions.

On parcels of twenty
contiguous acres or less the small forest landowner office shall work with
landowners with a total parcel ownership of less than eighty acres to develop
alternative management plans for riparian buffers. Such alternative plans
shall provide for the removal of leave trees as other new trees grow in order
to ensure the most effective protection of critical riparian function. The
office may recommend reasonable modifications in alternative management plans
of such landowners to further reduce risks to public resources and endangered
species so long as the anticipated operating costs are not unreasonably
increased and the landowner is not required to leave a greater volume than the
threshold level. To qualify for the provisions of this section, parcels must
be twenty acres or less in contiguous ownership, and owners cannot have
ownership interests in a total of more than eighty acres of forest lands within
the state. Owners who qualify for compliance with the streamside buffers
described in this section may instead choose to comply with rules adopted to
implement the forest and fish report under chapter 76.09 RCW. Owners who choose
to comply with the rules adopted to implement the forest and fish report are
eligible for compensation under the forest riparian easement program.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
4. A new section is added
to chapter 76.13 RCW to read as follows:

In order
to assist small forest landowners to remain economically viable, the
legislature intends that the small forest landowners be able to net fifty
percent of the value of the trees left in the buffer areas. The amount of
compensation offered in RCW 76.13.120 shall also include the compliance costs
for participation in the riparian easement program. For purposes of this
section, "compliance costs" includes the cost of preparing and
recording the easement, and any business and occupation tax and real estate
excise tax imposed because of entering into the easement.

---
END ---