BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF
WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1. RCW 76.09.370 and 1999
sp.s. c 4 s 204 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) The legislature
finds that the process that produced the forests and fish report was instigated
by the forest practices board, the report is the product of considerable
negotiations between several diverse interest groups, and the report has the
support of key federal agencies. When adopting permanent rules under this
section, the forest practices board is strongly encouraged to follow the
recommendations of the forests and fish report, but may include other
alternatives for protection of aquatic resources. If the forest practices
board chooses to adopt rules under this section that are not consistent with
the recommendations contained in the forests and fish report, the board must
notify the appropriate legislative committees of the proposed deviations, the
reasons for the proposed deviations, and whether the parties to the forests and
fish report still support the agreement. ((The board shall defer final
adoption of such rules for sixty days of the legislative session to allow for
the opportunity for additional public involvement and legislative oversight.))

(2) The forest
practices board shall follow the regular rules adoption process contained in
the administrative procedure act, chapter 34.05 RCW, when adopting permanent
rules pertaining to forest practices and the protection of aquatic resources
except as limited by subsection (1) of this section. The permanent rules must
accomplish the policies stated in RCW 76.09.010 without jeopardizing the
economic viability of the forest products industry.

(3) The rules adopted
under this section should be as specific as reasonably possible while also
allowing an applicant to propose alternate plans in response to site-specific
physical features. Alternate plans should provide protection to public resources
at least equal in overall effectiveness by alternate means.

(4) Rule making under
subsection (2) of this section shall be completed by ((June 30)) October
1, 2001, and shall have an effective date of March 15, 2002, unless the
legislature takes some action to forestall the effectiveness of the rules.

(5) The board should
consider coordinating any environmental review process under chapter 43.21C RCW
relating to the adoption of rules under subsection (2) of this section with any
review of a related proposal under the national environmental policy act (42
U.S.C. Sec. 4321, et seq.).

(6) After the board has
adopted permanent rules under subsection (2) of this section, changes to those
rules and any new rules covering aquatic resources may be adopted by the board
but only if the changes or new rules are consistent with recommendations
resulting from the scientifically based adaptive management process established
by a rule of the board. Any new rules or changes under this subsection need
not be based upon the recommendations of the adaptive management process if:
(a) The board is required to adopt or modify rules by the final order of any
court having jurisdiction thereof; or (b) future state legislation directs the
board to adopt or modify the rules.

(7) In adopting
permanent rules, the board shall incorporate the scientific-based adaptive
management process described in the forests and fish report which will be used
to determine the effectiveness of the new forest practices rules in aiding the
state's salmon recovery effort. The purpose of an adaptive management process
is to make adjustments as quickly as possible to forest practices that are not
achieving the resource objectives. The adaptive management process shall
incorporate the best available science and information, include protocols and
standards, regular monitoring, a scientific and peer review process, and
provide recommendations to the board on proposed changes to forest practices
rules to meet timber industry viability and salmon recovery.

Sec. 2. RCW 76.09.055 and 2000 c
11 s 4 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) The legislature
finds that the declines of fish stocks throughout much of the state require
immediate action to be taken to help restore these fish runs where possible.
The legislature also recognizes that federal and state agencies, tribes, county
representatives, and private timberland owners have spent considerable effort
and time to develop the forests and fish report. Given the agreement of the
parties, the legislature believes that the immediate adoption of emergency
rules is appropriate in this particular instance. These rules can implement
many provisions of the forests and fish report to protect the economic
well-being of the state, and to minimize the risk to the state and landowners
to legal challenges. This authority is not designed to set any precedents for
the forest practices board in future rule making or set any precedents for
other rule-making bodies of the state.

(2) The forest practices
board is authorized to adopt emergency rules amending the forest practices
rules with respect to the protection of aquatic resources, in accordance with
RCW 34.05.350, except: (a) That the rules adopted under this section may
remain in effect until the effective date of the permanent rules ((are
adopted, or until June 30, 2001, whichever is sooner)); (b) notice of the
proposed rules must be published in the Washington State Register as provided
in RCW 34.05.320; (c) at least one public hearing must be conducted with an
opportunity to provide oral and written comments; and (d) a rule-making file
must be maintained as required by RCW 34.05.370. In adopting the emergency
rules, the board is not required to prepare a small business economic impact statement
under chapter 19.85 RCW, prepare a statement indicating whether the rules
constitute a significant legislative rule under RCW 34.05.328, prepare a
significant legislative rule analysis under RCW 34.05.328, or follow the
procedural requirements of the state environmental policy act, chapter 43.21C
RCW. The forest practices board may only adopt recommendations contained in
the forests and fish report as emergency rules under this section.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 3. This act is necessary for
the immediate preservation of the public peace, health, or safety, or support
of the state government and its existing public institutions, and takes effect
immediately.

---
END ---