BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF
WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec.
1. Congress enacted the
forest resources conservation and shortage relief act in 1990 to prevent the
sale of unprocessed logs from federal lands. This law also prohibits the
"substitution" of timber, which is the continued export of private
timber by a company that also buys timber from federal lands for domestic
processing. When congress enacted this legislation, it granted the state and
its political subdivisions the authority to prohibit substitution of state
timber for private timber that is exported.

In 1991, the state
adopted rules to implement the federal ban on the export of unprocessed
timber. These rules, chapter 240-15 WAC, prohibit firms that export
unprocessed logs from bidding on state timber. Some concerns have been raised
that these rules may contribute to the lack of bidders on state and local
government timber sales. No state agency or official, however, has a clear
grant of authority to review or amend this policy. The legislature finds that
a state agency or official should be designated with this authority on behalf
of the state.

The legislature finds
that a joint select legislative task force, assisted by an advisory committee,
should be established to evaluate and make recommendations regarding the state
exercise of authority under the forest resources conservation and shortage
relief act, and also to identify and evaluate factors that contribute to the
amount of competition for state and local government timber sales.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
2. (1) A joint select
legislative task force is created to review the state's exercise of authority
under the federal forest resources conservation and shortage relief act, and to
identify and evaluate factors that contribute to the amount of competition for
state and local government timber sales.

(2) The joint select
legislative task force shall be composed of the chair and ranking minority
member of the senate natural resources, parks and shorelines committee; the
co-chairs of the house of representatives natural resources committee; the
chair and ranking minority member of the senate ways and means committee; and
the co-chairs of the house of representatives appropriations committee. Staff
support for the committee shall be provided by senate committee services and
the house of representatives office of program research.

(3) The task force
shall gather information regarding:

(a) Changes in the
forest products industry in Washington state since the rules were adopted;

(b) The current market
for state and local timber;

(c) Factors that
contribute to the sale of, and competition for, state and local government
timber, including but not limited to, appraisal practices and the processes
used by state and local governments for offering timber sales; and

(d) Other factors that
the task force considers appropriate.

(4) The task force may
recommend which agency or official of state government should have the authority
to review and amend the substitution of timber rules contained in chapter
240-15 WAC; any changes to such rules; changes to state and local government
timber appraisal and bidding practices; and related legislation that the
legislature should consider during the 2002 session. In developing the
recommendations, the task force shall consult with the advisory committee
created pursuant to section 3 of this act.

(5) The task force
shall report its findings and recommendations to the appropriate legislative
committees by January 1, 2002.

(6) This section
expires December 31, 2002.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
3. (1) An advisory committee
is established to assist the joint select legislative task force established
pursuant to section 2 of this act. The advisory committee shall provide
assistance upon request of the task force. Administrative support for the
advisory committee shall be provided by senate committee services and the house
of representatives office of program research.

(2) The advisory
committee shall be composed of the following members or their designees:

(a) The commissioner of
public lands;

(b) The superintendent
of public instruction;

(c) The president of
Washington State University;

(d) The president of
the University of Washington;

(e) A representative of
a county that manages its own timber lands directly, selected by the Washington
association of counties;

(f) A representative of
a county that is a beneficiary of forest board transfer lands managed on its
behalf by the department of natural resources, selected by the Washington
association of counties;

(g) The director of the
office of financial management;

(h) The director of the
department of revenue;

(i) A representative of
companies that purchase timber sales under current rules from the department of
natural resources, selected by representatives of those companies;

(j) A representative of
companies that operate forest product manufacturing facilities in this state
that are currently ineligible under current rules to purchase department of
natural resources timber sales, selected by representatives of those companies;

(k) A representative of
a labor union representing workers in forest product manufacturing facilities
in this state under a collective bargaining agreement, chosen by the state
labor council; and

(l) A representative of
a longshore union, chosen by representatives of those unions.

(3) The advisory
committee shall select a chair or cochairs from among its members for the
purpose of conducting meetings and transmitting information from the advisory
committee as a group to the joint select legislative task force. Any advisory
committee member may provide additional information to the task force.

(4) This section
expires December 31, 2002.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
4. A new section is added
to chapter 79.01 RCW to read as follows:

(1) Subject to the
provisions of subsection (2) of this section, the board of natural resources
may adopt, amend, or repeal rules on behalf of the state under the forest
resources conservation and shortage relief act, 16 U.S.C. Sec. 620c, including
any rules contained in chapter 240-15 WAC, subject to approval by the United
States secretary of commerce.

(2) The
board of natural resources may not initiate any rule that adopts, amends, or
repeals any rule under subsection (1) of this section before the adjournment of
the 2002 legislative session. Any action to adopt, amend, or repeal rules
under this section is not effective until approved or deemed approved by the
United States secretary of commerce. If the joint select legislative task
force recommends that a different state agency or official be given the
authority to adopt, amend, or repeal rules on behalf of the state under the
forest resources conservation and shortage relief act, then the authority of
the board to initiate rules under this section is null and void.

---
END ---