BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF
WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec.
1. A new section is added
to chapter 28A.220 RCW to read as follows:

(1) The legislature
finds that traffic safety education provides a solid foundation for young
drivers, and that driver education is required for anyone under the age of
eighteen years seeking a driver's license. Basic education is the state's
primary responsibility. However, driving is a privilege, and driver training
is not part of basic education. The state's subsidy of driver training
programs has been approximately eight million annually in recent years. The
legislature further finds that creating incentives for students to meet the
state's essential academic learning requirements to read with fluency and
comprehension and write with skill has the potential to increase student achievement.

(2) Any district that
maintains a traffic safety education course under RCW 28A.220.030, and imposes
a fee for enrollment or participation in its traffic safety education course
under RCW 28A.220.040, may waive the fee or fees for a student who has
demonstrated that he or she has met the state's tenth grade standards for
reading and writing as defined by the academic achievement commission.

(3) To be eligible for
a fee waiver under this section, a student must demonstrate his or her ability
to read with comprehension and write with skill by meeting or exceeding the
state's reading and writing standards as defined by the academic achievement
commission. The academic achievement commission shall determine the level of
achievement required on:

(a) The tenth grade
Washington assessment of student learning;

(b) A norm-referenced
test; or

(c) An alternative
assessment;

in order for the student to
demonstrate his or her ability to read with comprehension and write with skill.

(4) This section does
not require districts to pay for or reimburse the cost of student-selected
programs offered through outside providers.

(5) This
section is not intended to require funding of traffic safety education courses
as part of basic education funding.

--- END ---