BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF
WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1. RCW 71.09.092 and 1995 c
216 s 10 are each amended to read as follows:

Before the court may
enter an order directing conditional release to a less restrictive alternative,
it must find the following: (1) The person will be treated by a treatment
provider who is qualified to provide such treatment in the state of Washington
under chapter 18.155 RCW; (2) the treatment provider has presented a specific
course of treatment and has agreed to assume responsibility for such treatment
and will report progress to the court on a regular basis, and will report
violations immediately to the court, the prosecutor, the supervising community
corrections officer, and the superintendent of the special commitment center;
(3) housing exists that is sufficiently secure to protect the community, and
the person or agency providing housing to the conditionally released person has
agreed in writing to accept the person, to provide the level of security
required by the court, and immediately to report to the court, the prosecutor,
the supervising community corrections officer, and the superintendent of the
special commitment center if the person leaves the housing to which he or she
has been assigned without authorization; (4) the housing has been approved
by the legislature or meets criteria established by the legislature for the
housing of sexually violent predators determined to be eligible for release to
a less restrictive alternative; (5) the person is willing to comply with
the treatment provider and all requirements imposed by the treatment provider
and by the court; and (((5))) (6) the person is willing to comply
with supervision requirements imposed by the department of corrections.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 2. This act is necessary for
the immediate preservation of the public peace, health, or safety, or support
of the state government and its existing public institutions, and takes effect
immediately.

---
END ---