BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF
WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec.
1. A new section is added
to chapter 82.08 RCW to read as follows:

(1) "Green base
building" means: (a) A building where overall energy use is no more than
sixty-five percent of the use permitted under the Washington state energy code;
or (b) where each efficiency rated component identified in the Washington state
energy code is twenty-five percent more efficient than the designated minimum.

(2) The tax imposed by
RCW 82.08.020 does not apply to:

(a) Site preparation or
construction of a green base building;

(b) Materials used to
modify a nonqualifying structure into a green base building.

(3) The following are
not exempt under this section:

(a) Maintenance or
operation of a facility;

(b) Property with a
useful life of less than one year, such as consumables, supplies, and
single-use items; or

(c) Equipment used for
administrative or sales functions, such as furniture, filing cabinets, or computers.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
2. A new section is added
to chapter 82.12 RCW to read as follows:

The provisions of this
chapter do not apply with respect to the use of: (1) Materials used to modify
a nonqualifying structure into a green base building; or (2) materials used for
site preparation or construction of a green base building. The provisions of
section 1 of this act apply to this section.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 3. This act takes effect
October 1, 2001.

---
END ---