BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF
WASHINGTON:

_5 NEW SECTION. Sec. 1. A new section is
added to chapter 82.04

_6 RCW to read as follows:

_7 (1) A taxpayer may claim a credit against the tax
imposed by

_8 this chapter, equal to fifty percent of the amount of
state-

_9 approved child care benefits provided to employees of
the

10 taxpayer.

11 (2) Before claiming a credit under this section, a
taxpayer

12 must obtain approval of the proposed child care benefit
from the

13 department of social and health services. A request for
approval

14 must include a description of the child care benefit
provided to

15 the employee and the costs of the proposed child care
benefit to

16 the taxpayer and employee. The department of social and
health

17 services must approve a request if the department finds
that the

p. 1 HB
2112

_1 proposed child care benefit is consistent with the
purposes and

_2 requirements of chapter 74.15 RCW.

_3 (3) Application for credits under this section must
be made to

_4 the department of revenue in a form and manner as
required by the

_5 department. A credit must be claimed in the year in
which the

_6 expenditure is made. Credits may not exceed the amount
of tax that

_7 would otherwise be due under this chapter for a
reporting

_8 period. Unused credits may be carried forward and used
in future

_9 reporting periods.

10 (4) As used in this section, "child care
benefit" means one or

11 more of the following: (a) The value of an
employer-provided

12 voucher that can be used to pay part or all of the cost
of child

13 care in a state licensed facility; (b) the cost of
construction of

14 an employer-provided child care facility; or (c) the
cost of

15 operation and maintenance of an employer-provided child
care

16 facility.

17 NEW SECTION. Sec. 2. This act takes effect
October 1, 2001.

‑‑‑ END ‑‑‑

HB 2112 p. 2