BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF
WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1. RCW 47.60.326 and 1999 c
94 s 27 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) In order to
maintain an adequate, fair, and economically sound schedule of charges for the
transportation of passengers, vehicles, and commodities on the Washington state
ferries, the department of transportation each year shall conduct a full review
of such charges.

(2) Prior to February
1st of each odd-numbered year the department shall transmit to the
transportation commission a report of its review together with its
recommendations for the revision of a schedule of charges for the ensuing
biennium. The commission on or before July 1st of that year shall adopt as a
rule, in the manner provided by the Washington administrative procedure act, a
schedule of charges for the Washington state ferries for the ensuing biennium
commencing July 1st. The schedule may initially be adopted as an emergency
rule if necessary to take effect on, or as near as possible to, July 1st.

(3) The department in
making its review and formulating recommendations and the commission in
adopting a schedule of charges may consider any of the following factors:

(a) The amount of subsidy
available to the ferry system for maintenance and operation;

(b) The time and
distance of ferry runs;

(c) The maintenance and
operation costs for ferry runs with a proper adjustment for higher costs of
operating outmoded or less efficient equipment;

(d) The efficient
distribution of traffic between cross-sound routes;

(e) The desirability of
reasonable commutation rates for persons using the ferry system to commute
daily to work;

(f) The effect of
proposed fares in increasing walk-on and vehicular passenger use;

(g) The effect of
proposed fares in promoting all types of ferry use during nonpeak periods;

(h) Such other factors
as prudent managers of a major ferry system would consider.

(4) If at any time
during the biennium it appears that projected revenues from the Puget Sound
ferry operations account and any other operating subsidy available to the
Washington state ferries will be less than the projected total cost of
maintenance and operation of the Washington state ferries for the biennium, the
department shall forthwith undertake a review of its schedule of charges to
ascertain whether or not the schedule of charges should be revised. The
department shall, upon completion of its review report, submit its
recommendation to the transportation commission which may in its sound
discretion revise the schedule of charges as required to meet necessary
maintenance and operation expenditures of the ferry system for the biennium or
may defer action until the regular annual review and revision of ferry charges
as provided in subsection (2) of this section.

(5) The schedule of
charges adopted under this section must include a local impact surcharge to be
assessed in addition to the base tariff amounts. A twenty-five cent surcharge
must be assessed on each ticket sold by the ferry system for passage on a
Washington state ferry.

(a) The surcharge
collected from tickets purchased on a route must be placed in a separate
account and divided equally between the cities or towns that the ferry route
travels between. If a ferry terminal for a route is not in an incorporated
city or town, the surcharge distribution must be made to the county containing
the terminal.

(b) The local
government entity receiving revenue from the surcharge assessed under this
subsection shall use the proceeds to mitigate the local roadway and parking
impacts of vehicle traffic from ferries.

(6)
The provisions of RCW 47.60.330 relating to public participation shall apply to
the process of revising ferry tolls under this section.

--- END ---