BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF
WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1. RCW 43.88A.010 and 1977
ex.s. c 25 s 1 are each amended to read as follows:

The legislature hereby
recognizes the necessity of developing a uniform and coordinated procedure for
determining the expected fiscal impact of bills and resolutions on state and
local government. The legislature also recognizes that developing such
statements of fiscal impact, which shall be known as fiscal notes, requires the
designation of a state agency to be principally responsible therefor.

The legislature
further finds that legislative confidence in the accuracy, timeliness, and
independence of fiscal notes and the fiscal note process can best be promoted
when fiscal notes are jointly prepared through a nonpartisan process within the
legislative branch.

Sec. 2. RCW 43.132.010 and 1977
ex.s. c 19 s 1 are each amended to read as follows:

It is the intent of
this chapter to create a uniform and coordinated procedure within the
legislative branch to determine the fiscal impact of proposed legislation
on units of local government.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
3. DEFINITIONS. The
definitions in this section apply throughout this chapter unless the context
clearly requires otherwise.

(1) "Fiscal
note" means a written statement of the projected fiscal impact on the
state of a bill or resolution. The fiscal note shall state whether the bill or
resolution is projected to increase or decrease state government revenues or
expenditures. Fiscal notes shall indicate by fiscal year the total impact on
the state for the first two years the legislation would be in effect and shall
also include a cumulative six-year forecast of the fiscal impact. Fiscal notes
shall separately identify the fiscal impacts on the operating and capital
budgets. "Fiscal note" also includes "local government fiscal
note."

(2) "Local
government" means any county, city, town, or other unit of local
government.

(3) "Local
government fiscal note" means a written statement of the projected fiscal
impact of a bill or resolution on the local governments of the state. Local
government fiscal notes shall indicate by fiscal year the total impact on the
local governments involved for the first two years the legislation would be in
effect and shall also include a cumulative six-year forecast of the fiscal
impact. Where feasible and applicable, the local government fiscal note also
shall indicate the fiscal impact on each individual county or on a
representative sampling of cities, towns, or other units of local government.

(4) "The joint
legislative fiscal note process" means the legislature's process for
preparing fiscal notes as established by rule pursuant to section 4 of this
act.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
4. JOINT LEGISLATIVE FISCAL
NOTE PROCESS ESTABLISHED. (1) The house of representatives and the senate
shall establish by rule a joint legislative fiscal note process for the joint
preparation of fiscal notes, including local government fiscal notes. Under
the process, fiscal notes shall be prepared jointly by staff of senate
committee services and the house of representatives office of program research.

(2) The joint
legislative fiscal note process shall ensure that fiscal notes are timely,
accurate, impartial, and nonpartisan.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
5. INTERAGENCY COOPERATION.
To facilitate fiscal note preparation, the office of financial management,
other state agencies, and the various associations of local government shall,
upon request, provide data, information, and analysis to the legislature for
purposes of the joint legislative fiscal note process.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
6. REQUESTS FOR FISCAL
NOTES. Unless otherwise specified by the rules adopted by the senate and the
house of representatives pursuant to section 4 of this act:

(1) Any legislator may
request a fiscal note or local government fiscal note on any bill or
resolution.

(2) Fiscal notes shall
be completed within one week of receipt of the request, unless a longer time
period is allowed by the requesting legislator.

(3) A request for a
fiscal note on legislation is a continuing request for a fiscal note on any
formal alteration of the legislation in the form of amendments to the
legislation that are adopted by a committee or a house of the legislature or a
substitute version of such legislation that is adopted by a committee. If a
formal alteration is adopted on the legislation, preparation of the fiscal note
on the prior version of the legislation shall stop, unless the legislator
requesting the fiscal note specifies otherwise or the altered version is first
adopted or enacted in the last week of a legislative session.

(4) Any legislator may
request a fiscal note on any legislative proposal. The fiscal note shall be
returned to the requesting legislator. When the legislative proposal is
introduced in either house, copies shall be filed with the appropriate
committees and persons as provided in section 7 of this act.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
7. DISTRIBUTION OF FISCAL
NOTES. (1) When a fiscal note is completed, copies shall be filed immediately
with:

(a) The chair of the
committee to which the bill or resolution was referred upon introduction in the
house of origin;

(b) The senate
committee on ways and means, or its successor;

(c) The house
committees on revenue and appropriations, or their successors;

(d) The requesting
legislator;

(e) The secretary of
the senate; and

(f) The chief clerk of
the house of representatives.

(2) Whenever possible,
the fiscal note shall be provided before or at the time the bill or resolution
is first heard by the first committee of reference in the house of origin.

(3) When a fiscal note
has been prepared for a bill or resolution, a copy of the fiscal note shall be
placed in the bill books or otherwise attached to the bill or resolution and
shall remain with the bill or resolution throughout the legislative process
insofar as possible.

(4) The legislature,
through the joint legislative fiscal note process, shall make additional copies
of the fiscal note available to members of the legislature and others on
request.

(5) Whenever proposed
legislation accompanied by a fiscal note is passed by either the senate or the
house of representatives, the fiscal note shall be transmitted with the bill to
the other house.

Sec. 8. RCW 43.132.800 and 2000
c 182 s 5 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) The ((office of
financial management, in consultation with the department of community, trade,
and economic development)) legislature, through the joint legislative
fiscal note process, shall annually prepare a report on the fiscal impacts
to counties, cities, towns, and other units of local governments, arising from
selected laws enacted in the preceding five-year period. The office of
financial management, in consultation with the department of community, trade,
and economic development, shall annually select up to five laws to include
within this report from a recommended list of laws approved by the
legislature. The office of financial management, in consultation with the department
of community, trade, and economic development, may select up to five laws to
include within this report if the legislature does not approve a recommended
list.

(2) The
preparation of the reports required in subsection (1) of this section is subject
to available funding.

Sec. 9. RCW 43.132.810 and 2000
c 182 s 6 are each amended to read as follows:

The ((office of
financial management, in consultation with the department of community, trade,
and economic development)) legislature, through the joint legislative
fiscal note process, shall prepare a report for the legislature on or
before December 31st of every even-numbered year on local government fiscal
notes, and reports on the fiscal impacts on local governments arising from
selected laws, that were prepared over the preceding two-year period.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
10. Sections 3 through 7 of
this act constitute a new chapter in Title 44 RCW.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
11. RCW 43.88A.010,
43.132.010, 43.132.055, 43.132.060, 43.132.800, 43.132.810, and 2000 c 182 s 1
(uncodified) are each recodified as sections in the chapter created in section
10 of this act.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
12. The following acts or
parts of acts are each repealed:

(1) RCW 43.88A.020 (Fiscal
notes--Preparation--Contents--Duties of office of financial management) and
1994 c 219 s 3, 1979 c 151 s 146, & 1977 ex.s. c 25 s 2;

(2) RCW 43.88A.030 (Fiscal
notes--Distribution) and 1986 c 158 s 16, 1979 ex.s. c 112 s 1, 1979 c 151 s
147, & 1977 ex.s. c 25 s 3;

(3) RCW 43.88A.040 (Fiscal notes--Preparation
upon request of any legislator) and 1979 c 151 s 148 & 1977 ex.s. c 25 s 4;

(4) RCW 43.88A.900 (Construction of chapter)
and 1977 ex.s. c 25 s 5;

(5) RCW 43.132.020 (Fiscal
notes--Preparation--Contents--Scope--Revisions--Reports) and 2000 c 182 s 2,
1995 c 399 s 79, 1984 c 125 s 16, 1979 c 151 s 149, & 1977 ex.s. c 19 s 2;

(6) RCW 43.132.030 (Designation of department
of community, trade, and economic development to prepare fiscal
notes--Cooperation of state agencies, legislative staffs, and local government
associations) and 1995 c 399 s 80, 1985 c 6 s 10, 1979 c 151 s 150, & 1977
ex.s. c 19 s 3;

(7) RCW 43.132.040 (Fiscal
notes--Transmission of copies to designated recipients) and 2000 c 182 s 3,
1986 c 158 s 18, 1979 c 151 s 151, & 1977 ex.s. c 19 s 4; and

(8) RCW 43.132.050 (Fiscal
notes--Transmission of copies upon request) and 1986 c 158 s 19, 1979 c 151 s
152, & 1977 ex.s. c 19 s 5.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
13. Captions used in this act
are not any part of the law.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 14. This act is necessary for
the immediate preservation of the public peace, health, or safety, or support
of the state government and its existing public institutions, and takes effect
July 1, 2001.

---
END ---