BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF
WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1. RCW 48.18.080 and 1947 c
79 s .18.08 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) No application for
the issuance of any insurance policy or contract shall be admissible in
evidence in any action relative to such policy or contract, unless a true copy
of the application was attached to or otherwise made a part of the policy when
issued and delivered. This ((provision shall)) subsection does
not apply to policies or contracts of industrial life insurance, property
insurance, or casualty insurance.

(2) If any
policy of life or disability insurance delivered in this state is reinstated or
renewed, and the insured or the beneficiary or assignee of the policy makes
written request to the insurer for a copy of the application, if any, for such
reinstatement or renewal, the insurer shall, within fifteen days after receipt
of such request at its home office or at any of its branch offices, deliver or
mail to the person making such request, a copy of such application. If such
copy is not so delivered or mailed, the insurer shall be precluded from
introducing the application as evidence in any action or proceeding based upon
or involving the policy or its reinstatement or renewal.

--- END ---