BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF
WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1. RCW 34.05.328 and 1997 c
430 s 1 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) Before adopting a
rule described in subsection (5) of this section, an agency shall:

(a) Clearly state in
detail the general goals and specific objectives of the statute that the rule
implements;

(b) Determine that the
rule is needed to achieve the general goals and specific objectives stated
under (a) of this subsection, and analyze alternatives to rule making and the
consequences of not adopting the rule;

(c) Determine that the
probable benefits of the rule are greater than its probable costs, taking into
account both the qualitative and quantitative benefits and costs and the
specific directives of the statute being implemented;

(d) Determine, after
considering alternative versions of the rule and the analysis required under
(b) and (c) of this subsection, that the rule being adopted is the least
burdensome alternative for those required to comply with it that will achieve
the general goals and specific objectives stated under (a) of this subsection;

(e) Determine that the
rule does not require those to whom it applies to take an action that violates
requirements of another federal or state law;

(f) Determine that the
rule does not impose more stringent performance requirements on private
entities than on public entities unless required to do so by federal or state
law;

(g) Determine if the
rule differs from any federal regulation or statute applicable to the same
activity or subject matter and, if so, determine that the difference is
justified by the following:

(i) A state statute
that explicitly allows the agency to differ from federal standards; or

(ii) Substantial
evidence that the difference is necessary to achieve the general goals and
specific objectives stated under (a) of this subsection; and

(h) Coordinate the
rule, to the maximum extent practicable, with other federal, state, and local
laws applicable to the same activity or subject matter.

(2) In making its
determinations pursuant to subsection (1)(b) through (g) of this section, the
agency shall place in the rule-making file documentation of sufficient quantity
and quality so as to persuade a reasonable person that the determinations are
justified.

(3) Before adopting
rules described in subsection (5) of this section, an agency shall place in the
rule-making file a rule implementation plan for rules filed under each adopting
order. The plan shall describe how the agency intends to:

(a) Implement and
enforce the rule, including a description of the resources the agency intends
to use;

(b) Inform and educate
affected persons about the rule;

(c) Promote and assist
voluntary compliance; and

(d) Evaluate whether
the rule achieves the purpose for which it was adopted, including, to the
maximum extent practicable, the use of interim milestones to assess progress
and the use of objectively measurable outcomes.

(4) After adopting a
rule described in subsection (5) of this section regulating the same activity
or subject matter as another provision of federal or state law, an agency shall
do all of the following:

(a) ((Provide to the
business assistance center a list citing by reference the other federal and
state laws that regulate the same activity or subject matter;

(b))) Coordinate implementation and enforcement of
the rule with the other federal and state entities regulating the same activity
or subject matter by making every effort to do one or more of the following:

(i) Deferring to the
other entity;

(ii) Designating a lead
agency; or

(iii) Entering into an
agreement with the other entities specifying how the agency and entities will
coordinate implementation and enforcement.

If the agency is unable
to comply with this subsection (4)(((b))) (a), the agency shall
report to the legislature pursuant to (((c))) (b) of this
subsection;

(((c))) (b)
Report to the joint administrative rules review committee:

(i) The existence of
any overlap or duplication of other federal or state laws, any differences from
federal law, and any known overlap, duplication, or conflict with local laws;
and

(ii) Make
recommendations for any legislation that may be necessary to eliminate or
mitigate any adverse effects of such overlap, duplication, or difference.

(5)(a) Except as
provided in (b) of this subsection, this section applies to:

(i) Significant
legislative rules of the departments of ecology, labor and industries, health,
revenue, social and health services, and natural resources, the employment
security department, the forest practices board, the office of the insurance
commissioner, and to the legislative rules of the department of fish and
wildlife implementing chapter ((75.20)) 77.55 RCW; and

(ii) Any rule of any
agency, if this section is voluntarily made applicable to the rule by the
agency, or is made applicable to the rule by a majority vote of the joint
administrative rules review committee within forty-five days of receiving the
notice of proposed rule making under RCW 34.05.320.

(b) This section does
not apply to:

(i) Emergency rules
adopted under RCW 34.05.350;

(ii) Rules relating
only to internal governmental operations that are not subject to violation by a
nongovernment party;

(iii) Rules adopting or
incorporating by reference without material change federal statutes or
regulations, Washington state statutes, rules of other Washington state
agencies, shoreline master programs other than those programs governing
shorelines of statewide significance, or, as referenced by Washington state
law, national consensus codes that generally establish industry standards, if
the material adopted or incorporated regulates the same subject matter and
conduct as the adopting or incorporating rule;

(iv) Rules that only
correct typographical errors, make address or name changes, or clarify language
of a rule without changing its effect;

(v) Rules the content
of which is explicitly and specifically dictated by statute;

(vi) Rules that set or
adjust fees or rates pursuant to legislative standards; or

(vii) Rules of the
department of social and health services relating only to client medical or
financial eligibility and rules concerning liability for care of dependents.

(c) For purposes of
this subsection:

(i) A "procedural
rule" is a rule that adopts, amends, or repeals (A) any procedure,
practice, or requirement relating to any agency hearings; (B) any filing or
related process requirement for making application to an agency for a license
or permit; or (C) any policy statement pertaining to the consistent internal
operations of an agency.

(ii) An
"interpretive rule" is a rule, the violation of which does not
subject a person to a penalty or sanction, that sets forth the agency’s
interpretation of statutory provisions it administers.

(iii) A
"significant legislative rule" is a rule other than a procedural or
interpretive rule that (A) adopts substantive provisions of law pursuant to
delegated legislative authority, the violation of which subjects a violator of
such rule to a penalty or sanction; (B) establishes, alters, or revokes any
qualification or standard for the issuance, suspension, or revocation of a
license or permit; or (C) adopts a new, or makes significant amendments to, a
policy or regulatory program.

(d) In the notice of
proposed rule making under RCW 34.05.320, an agency shall state whether this
section applies to the proposed rule pursuant to (a)(i) of this subsection, or
if the agency will apply this section voluntarily.

(((6) By January 31,
1996, and by January 31st of each even-numbered year thereafter, the office of
financial management, after consulting with state agencies, counties, and
cities, and business, labor, and environmental organizations, shall report to
the governor and the legislature regarding the effects of this section on the
regulatory system in this state. The report shall document:

(a) The rules
proposed to which this section applied and to the extent possible, how
compliance with this section affected the substance of the rule, if any, that
the agency ultimately adopted;

(b) The costs
incurred by state agencies in complying with this section;

(c) Any legal action
maintained based upon the alleged failure of any agency to comply with this
section, the costs to the state of such action, and the result;

(d) The extent to
which this section has adversely affected the capacity of agencies to fulfill
their legislatively prescribed mission;

(e) The extent to
which this section has improved the acceptability of state rules to those
regulated; and

(f) Any other
information considered by the office of financial management to be useful in
evaluating the effect of this section.))

Sec. 2. RCW 43.20B.030 and 1997
c 130 s 5 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) Except as otherwise
provided by law, there will be no collection of overpayments and other debts
due the department after the expiration of six years from the date of notice of
such overpayment or other debt unless the department has commenced recovery
action in a court of law or unless an administrative remedy authorized by
statute is in place. However, any amount due in a case thus extended shall
cease to be a debt due the department at the expiration of ten years from the
date of the notice of the overpayment or other debt unless a court-ordered
remedy would be in effect for a longer period.

(2)(((a))) The
department, at any time, may accept offers of compromise of disputed claims or
may grant partial or total write-off of any debt due the department if it is no
longer cost-effective to pursue. The department shall adopt rules establishing
the considerations to be made in the granting or denial of a partial or total
write-off of debts.

(((b) Beginning
December 1, 1997, the department shall report by December 1 each year to the
commerce and labor committees of the senate and house of representatives, the
senate ways and means committee, and the house appropriations committee, or
successor committees, the following information:

(i) The cumulative
amount of debt due the department;

(ii) The cumulative
amount of debt that has been written off by the department as no longer
cost-effective to pursue;

(iii) The amount of
debt due the department that has accrued in each of the previous five fiscal
years; and

(iv) The amount of
debt that has been written off in each of the previous five fiscal years as no
longer cost-effective to pursue.))

Sec. 3. RCW 43.79.460 and 1998 c
302 s 1 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) The savings
incentive account is created in the custody of the state treasurer. The
account shall consist of all moneys appropriated to the account by the legislature.
The account is subject to the allotment procedures under chapter 43.88 RCW, but
no appropriation is required for expenditures from the account.

(2) Within the savings
incentive account, the state treasurer may create subaccounts to be credited
with incentive savings attributable to individual state agencies, as determined
by the office of financial management in consultation with the legislative
fiscal committees. Moneys deposited in the subaccounts may be expended only on
the authorization of the agency's executive head or designee and only for the
purpose of one-time expenditures to improve the quality, efficiency, and
effectiveness of services to customers of the state, such as one-time
expenditures for employee training, employee incentives, technology
improvements, new work processes, or performance measurement. Funds may not be
expended from the account to establish new programs or services, expand
existing programs or services, or incur ongoing costs that would require future
expenditures.

(3) For purposes of
this section, "incentive savings" means state general fund
appropriations that are unspent as of June 30th of a fiscal year, excluding any
amounts included in across-the-board reductions under RCW 43.88.110 and
excluding unspent appropriations for:

(a) Caseload and
enrollment in entitlement programs, except to the extent that an agency has
clearly demonstrated that efficiencies have been achieved in the administration
of the entitlement program. "Entitlement program," as used in this
section, includes programs for which specific sums of money are appropriated
for pass-through to third parties or other entities;

(b) Enrollments in
state institutions of higher education;

(c) A specific amount
contained in a condition or limitation to an appropriation in the biennial
appropriations act, if the agency did not achieve the specific purpose or
objective of the condition or limitation;

(d) Debt service on
state obligations; and

(e) State retirement
system obligations.

(4) The office of ((fiscal
[financial])) financial management, after consulting with the
legislative fiscal committees, shall report to the treasurer the amount of
savings incentives achieved. ((By December 1, 1998, and each December 1st
thereafter, the office of financial management shall submit a report to the
fiscal committees of the legislature on the implementation of this section.
The report shall (a) evaluate the impact of this section on agency reversions
and end-of-biennium expenditure patterns, and (b) itemize agency expenditures
from the savings recovery account.))

Sec. 4. RCW 43.88.110 and 1997 c
96 s 6 are each amended to read as follows:

This section sets forth
the expenditure programs and the allotment and reserve procedures to be
followed by the executive branch for public funds.

(1) Allotments of an
appropriation for any fiscal period shall conform to the terms, limits, or
conditions of the appropriation.

(2) The director of
financial management shall provide all agencies with a complete set of
operating and capital instructions for preparing a statement of proposed
expenditures at least thirty days before the beginning of a fiscal period. The
set of instructions need not include specific appropriation amounts for the
agency.

(3) Within forty-five
days after the beginning of the fiscal period or within forty-five days after
the governor signs the omnibus biennial appropriations act, whichever is later,
all agencies shall submit to the governor a statement of proposed expenditures
at such times and in such form as may be required by the governor.

(4) The office of
financial management shall develop a method for monitoring capital
appropriations and expenditures that will capture at least the following
elements:

(a) Appropriations made
for capital projects including transportation projects;

(b) Estimates of total
project costs including past, current, ensuing, and future biennial costs;

(c) Comparisons of
actual costs to estimated costs;

(d) Comparisons of
estimated construction start and completion dates with actual dates;

(e) Documentation of
fund shifts between projects.

This data may be
incorporated into the existing accounting system or into a separate project
management system, as deemed appropriate by the office of financial management.

(5) The office of
financial management shall publish agency annual maintenance summary reports
beginning in October 1997. State agencies shall submit a separate report for
each major campus or site, as defined by the office of financial management.
Reports shall be prepared in a format prescribed by the office of financial
management and shall include, but not be limited to: Information describing
the number, size, and condition of state-owned facilities; facility
maintenance, repair, and operating expenses paid from the state operating and
capital budgets, including maintenance staffing levels; the condition of major
infrastructure systems; and maintenance management initiatives undertaken by
the agency over the prior year. Agencies shall submit their annual maintenance
summary reports to the office of financial management by September 1st
each year.

(6) The office of
financial management, prior to approving allotments for major capital
construction projects valued over five million dollars, shall institute
procedures for reviewing such projects at the predesign stage that will reduce
long-term costs and increase facility efficiency. The procedures shall
include, but not be limited to, the following elements:

(a) Evaluation of
facility program requirements and consistency with long-range plans;

(b) Utilization of a
system of cost, quality, and performance standards to compare major capital
construction projects; and

(c) A requirement to
incorporate value-engineering analysis and constructability review into the
project schedule.

(7) No expenditure may
be incurred or obligation entered into for such major capital construction
projects including, without exception, land acquisition, site development,
predesign, design, construction, and equipment acquisition and installation,
until the allotment of the funds to be expended has been approved by the office
of financial management. This limitation does not prohibit the continuation of
expenditures and obligations into the succeeding biennium for projects for
which allotments have been approved in the immediate prior biennium.

(8) If at any time
during the fiscal period the governor projects a cash deficit in a particular
fund or account as defined by RCW 43.88.050, the governor shall make
across-the-board reductions in allotments for that particular fund or account
so as to prevent a cash deficit, unless the legislature has directed the
liquidation of the cash deficit over one or more fiscal periods. Except for
the legislative and judicial branches and other agencies headed by elective
officials, the governor shall review the statement of proposed operating
expenditures for reasonableness and conformance with legislative intent. Once
the governor approves the statements of proposed operating expenditures,
further revisions shall be made only at the beginning of the second fiscal year
and must be initiated by the governor. However, changes in appropriation level
authorized by the legislature, changes required by across-the-board reductions
mandated by the governor, changes caused by executive increases to spending
authority, and changes caused by executive decreases to spending authority for
failure to comply with the provisions of chapter 36.70A RCW may require
additional revisions. Revisions shall not be made retroactively. Revisions
caused by executive increases to spending authority shall not be made after
June 30, 1987. However, the governor may assign to a reserve status any
portion of an agency appropriation withheld as part of across-the-board
reductions made by the governor and any portion of an agency appropriation
conditioned on a contingent event by the appropriations act. The governor may
remove these amounts from reserve status if the across-the-board reductions are
subsequently modified or if the contingent event occurs. The director of
financial management shall enter approved statements of proposed expenditures
into the state budgeting, accounting, and reporting system within forty-five
days after receipt of the proposed statements from the agencies. If an agency
or the director of financial management is unable to meet these requirements,
the director of financial management shall provide a timely explanation in
writing to the legislative fiscal committees.

(9) It is expressly
provided that all agencies shall be required to maintain accounting records and
to report thereon in the manner prescribed in this chapter and under the
regulations issued pursuant to this chapter. Within ninety days of the end of
the fiscal year, all agencies shall submit to the director of financial
management their final adjustments to close their books for the fiscal year.
Prior to submitting fiscal data, written or oral, to committees of the
legislature, it is the responsibility of the agency submitting the data to
reconcile it with the budget and accounting data reported by the agency to the
director of financial management.

(10) The director of
financial management shall monitor agency operating expenditures against the
approved statement of proposed expenditures ((and shall provide the
legislature with quarterly explanations of major variances)).

(11) The director of
financial management may exempt certain public funds from the allotment
controls established under this chapter if it is not practical or necessary to
allot the funds. Allotment control exemptions expire at the end of the fiscal
biennium for which they are granted. The director of financial management
shall report any exemptions granted under this subsection to the legislative
fiscal committees.

Sec. 5. RCW 74.09.310 and 1998 c
314 s 34 are each amended to read as follows:

The department may make
available, or cause to be made available, pharmaceutical birth control
services, information, and counseling to any person who enters chemical
dependency treatment under section 20 or 21 of this act. Within available
funds, the department may pay for any tubal ligations requested under section
19 of this act if the mother's income is less than two hundred percent of the
federal poverty level. ((The department shall report by December 1st of
each year to the governor and legislature: (1) The number of tubal ligations
performed as a result of chapter 314, Laws of 1998; (2) the number of women who
decline to undergo the surgery; (3) the number of women who obtain
pharmaceutical birth control, by type of birth control; and (4) the number of
women who are reported to the department.))

Sec. 6. RCW 74.09.320 and 1998 c
314 s 35 are each amended to read as follows:

The department may make
available, or cause to be made available, pharmaceutical birth control
services, information, and counseling to any person who enters chemical
dependency treatment under section 27 of this act. Within available funds, the
department may pay for any tubal ligations requested under section 26 of this
act if the mother's income is less than two hundred percent of the federal
poverty level. ((The department shall report by December 1st of each year
to the governor and legislature: (1) The number of tubal ligations performed
as a result of chapter 314, Laws of 1998; (2) the number of women who decline
to undergo the surgery; (3) the number of women who obtain pharmaceutical birth
control, by type of birth control; and (4) the number of women who are reported
to the department.))

Sec. 7. RCW 84.33.200 and 1998 c
245 s 170 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) The legislature
shall review the system of distribution and allocation of all timber excise tax
revenues in January 1975 and each year thereafter to provide a uniform and
equitable distribution and allocation of such revenues to the state and local
taxing districts.

(2) In order to allow
legislative review of the rules to be adopted by the department of revenue
establishing the stumpage values provided for in RCW 84.33.091, such rules
shall be effective not less than sixty days after transmitting to the staffs of
the senate and house ways and means committees (or their successor committees)
the same proposed rules as have been previously filed with the office of the
code reviser pursuant to RCW 34.05.320.

(3) The department of
revenue and the department of natural resources shall make available to the
revenue committees of the senate and house of representatives of the state
legislature information and data, as it may be available, pertaining to the
status of forest land grading throughout the state, the collection of timber
excise tax revenues, the distribution and allocation of timber excise tax
revenues to the state and local taxing districts, and any other information as
may be necessary for the proper legislative review and implementation of the
timber excise tax system((, and in addition, the departments shall provide
an annual report of such matters in January of each year to such committees)).

NEW SECTION. Sec.
8. The following acts or
parts of acts are each repealed:

(1) RCW 15.58.420 (Report to legislature)
and 1997 c 242 s 9 & 1989 c 380 s 30;

(2) RCW 17.21.350 (Report to legislature)
and 1997 c 242 s 19 & 1989 c 380 s 64;

(3) RCW 43.41.220 (Review of boards and
commissions by governor--Report--Termination--Transfers) and 1994 sp.s. c 9 s
873;

(4) RCW 43.41.230 (Boards and commissions
reviewed--Exceptions) and 1994 sp.s. c 9 s 874;

(5) RCW 43.88.510 (State boards,
commissions, councils, and committees--Submission of list and data to
legislature) and 1996 c 288 s 42, 1987 c 505 s 37, 1979 c 151 s 144, & 1977
c 23 s 3;

(6) RCW 71.36.020 (Inventory of mental
health programs for children--Plan for early periodic screening, diagnosis, and
treatment services) and 1991 c 326 s 13; and

(7) RCW 82.08.0201 (Rental cars--Estimate of
tax revenue) and 1992 c 194 s 10.

---
END ---