BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF
WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec.
1. Washington state is
facing an energy shortage that will require a combination of strategies
including conservation and additional generation capacity. Since 1995,
Washington state has had a policy of encouraging investment in manufacturing by
exempting the sales and use tax on new equipment.

The legislature intends
to encourage investment in all forms of additional electrical generation for
the express purpose of supporting the continued growth of existing Washington
state industries and the state's high-tech sector. Extending the existing
exemption for manufacturing equipment to power generation is one way to
encourage that investment.

The legislature also
intends to strongly encourage the development of sufficient generating
infrastructure to provide electricity for Washington state residents at stable,
affordable prices.

Sec. 2. RCW 82.08.02565 and 1999
c 211 s 5 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) The tax levied by
RCW 82.08.020 shall not apply to sales to a manufacturer or processor for hire
of machinery and equipment used directly in a manufacturing operation or
research and development operation, to sales to a person engaged in testing for
a manufacturer or processor for hire of machinery and equipment used directly
in a testing operation, or to sales of or charges made for labor and services
rendered in respect to installing, repairing, cleaning, altering, or improving
the machinery and equipment, but only when the purchaser provides the seller
with an exemption certificate in a form and manner prescribed by the department
by rule. The seller shall retain a copy of the certificate for the seller's
files.

(2) For purposes of
this section and RCW 82.12.02565:

(a) "Machinery and
equipment" means industrial fixtures, devices, and support facilities, and
tangible personal property that becomes an ingredient or component thereof,
including repair parts and replacement parts. "Machinery and equipment"
includes pollution control equipment installed and used in a manufacturing
operation, testing operation, or research and development operation to prevent
air pollution, water pollution, or contamination that might otherwise result
from the manufacturing operation, testing operation, or research and
development operation.

(b) "Machinery and
equipment" does not include:

(i) Hand-powered tools;

(ii) Property with a
useful life of less than one year;

(iii) Buildings, other
than machinery and equipment that is permanently affixed to or becomes a
physical part of a building; and

(iv) Building fixtures
that are not integral to the manufacturing operation, testing operation, or
research and development operation that are permanently affixed to and become a
physical part of a building, such as utility systems for heating, ventilation,
air conditioning, communications, plumbing, or electrical.

(c) Machinery and
equipment is "used directly" in a manufacturing operation, testing
operation, or research and development operation if the machinery and
equipment:

(i) Acts upon or
interacts with an item of tangible personal property;

(ii) Conveys,
transports, handles, or temporarily stores an item of tangible personal
property at the manufacturing site or testing site;

(iii) Controls, guides,
measures, verifies, aligns, regulates, or tests tangible personal property at
the site or away from the site;

(iv) Provides physical
support for or access to tangible personal property;

(v) Produces power for,
or lubricates machinery and equipment;

(vi) Produces another
item of tangible personal property for use in the manufacturing operation,
testing operation, or research and development operation;

(vii) Places tangible
personal property in the container, package, or wrapping in which the tangible
personal property is normally sold or transported; or

(viii) Is integral to
research and development as defined in RCW 82.63.010.

(d) "Manufacturing
operation" means the manufacturing of articles, substances, or commodities
for sale as tangible personal property. A manufacturing operation begins at
the point where the raw materials enter the manufacturing site and ends at the
point where the processed material leaves the manufacturing site. The term
also includes ((that portion of a cogeneration project that is used to
generate power for consumption within the manufacturing site of which the
cogeneration project is an integral part)) electrical generation.
The term does not include ((the production of electricity by a light and
power business as defined in RCW 82.16.010 or)) the preparation of food
products on the premises of a person selling food products at retail.

(e) (("Cogeneration"
means the simultaneous generation of electrical energy and low-grade heat from
the same fuel.

(f))) "Research and development operation"
means engaging in research and development as defined in RCW 82.63.010 by a
manufacturer or processor for hire.

(((g))) (f)
"Testing" means activities performed to establish or determine the
properties, qualities, and limitations of tangible personal property.

(((h))) (g)
"Testing operation" means the testing of tangible personal property
for a manufacturer or processor for hire. A testing operation begins at the
point where the tangible personal property enters the testing site and ends at
the point where the tangible personal property leaves the testing site. ((The
term also includes that portion of a cogeneration project that is used to
generate power for consumption within the site of which the cogeneration
project is an integral part.)) The term does not include ((the
production of electricity by a light and power business as defined in RCW
82.16.010 or the)) preparation of food products on the premises of a person
selling food products at retail.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
3. (1) Except as provided in
subsection (2) of this section or section 4 of this act, taxes exempted under
RCW 82.08.02565 or 82.12.02565 need not be repaid.

(2) If, on the basis of
a report under section 5 of this act or other information, the department finds
that an electrical generation facility is no longer used for the generation of
electricity, the exempted taxes under RCW 82.08.02565 or 82.12.02565 are
immediately due according to the following repayment schedule.

Year in which facility
becomes Percent of deferred taxes due

ineligible for deferral

1 100 percent

2 87.5 percent

3 75 percent

4 62.5 percent

5 50 percent

6 37.5 percent

7 25 percent

8 12.5 percent

The department shall
assess interest at the rate provided for delinquent taxes, but not penalties,
retroactively to the date of deferral.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
4. (1) Except as provided in
subsection (2) of this section or section 3 of this act, taxes exempted under
RCW 82.08.02565 or 82.12.02565 need not be repaid.

(2) If, on the basis of
a report under section 5 of this act or other information, the department finds
that an electrical generation facility is selling less than seventy percent of
its electricity to businesses domiciled in the state of Washington or end users
located in the state of Washington during the calendar year in which the
electrical generation facility first takes an exemption under RCW 82.08.02565
or 82.12.02565, or in any calendar year during the nine succeeding calendar
years, ten percent of the total amount of taxes exempted under RCW 82.08.02565
or 82.12.02565 are immediately due. This amount is multiplied by one minus the
ratio of the percent of sales made to businesses domiciled in the state of
Washington or end users located in the state of Washington divided by seventy
percent.

(3) The department
shall assess interest at the rate provided for delinquent taxes, but not
penalties, retroactively to the date of deferral.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
5. Each recipient of an
exemption granted under RCW 82.08.02565 or 82.12.02565 shall submit a report to
the department on December 31st of the year in which the electrical generation
facility first takes an exemption under RCW 82.08.02565 or 82.12.02565, and on
December 31st of each of the nine succeeding calendar years. The report shall
contain information, as required by the department, from which the department
may determine whether the recipient is meeting the requirements of this
chapter, including information on the sales of electricity for the prior
calendar year. If the recipient fails to submit a report or submits an
inadequate report, the department may declare the amount of exempted taxes
outstanding to be immediately assessed and payable.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
6. Sections 3 through 5 of
this act are each added to chapter 82.08 RCW.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
7. If any provision of this
act or its application to any person or circumstance is held invalid, the
remainder of the act or the application of the provision to other persons or
circumstances is not affected.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 8. This act is necessary for
the immediate preservation of the public peace, health, or safety, or support
of the state government and its existing public institutions, and takes effect
July 1, 2001.

---
END ---