BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF
WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec.
1. A new section is added
to chapter 43.88 RCW to read as follows:

(1) The department of
transportation, the department of licensing, and the Washington state patrol
shall implement a performance-based budgeting process that includes cost and
quality performance metrics and provides a measurable link between agency
authorizing statutes, agency objectives, service levels, and level of budget.

(2) Each agency
specified in subsection (1) of this section shall review and inventory all
programs within the agency and prepare a report that recommends whether to
retain, eliminate, or modify the programs and funding based on authorizing
language or a need for the public service, along with any related statutory
changes. Each agency shall submit the report along with the agency's biennial
budget request. All future policy and budget decisions beginning with the
2003-2005 biennial budget must be based on whether performance-based budgeting techniques
have been implemented and support the agency's budget and policy requests.

(3) The
transportation agencies will develop budgets for the following programs at the
program level or subprogram level for performance-based budgeting purposes.
The department of transportation will implement performance-based budgeting
techniques in highway maintenance, highway preservation, and highway
improvements in conjunction with planning. The department of licensing will
implement performance-based budgeting techniques in vehicle services for
vehicle titling and registration and driver services in the licensing service
offices. The Washington state patrol will implement performance-based
budgeting in field operations, commercial vehicle enforcement, and investigations.

--- END ---