BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF
WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec.
1. The legislature
recognizes the unique needs of the citizens of the state who live and are
employed around Puget Sound, the businesses who must cross Puget Sound as part
of conducting business, and the tourists who visit the area. The legislature
also recognizes the part played by the Washington state ferry system in meeting
these needs. The governor, as head of the executive branch, should have direct
control over the Washington state ferry system. The legislature therefore
finds and declares that a separate agency in state government should be created
to service those requirements.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
2. As used in this chapter,
unless the context indicates otherwise:

(1)
"Department" means the Washington state ferries department.

(2)
"Director" means the director of Washington state ferries.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
3. (1) A department of state
government to be known as the Washington state ferries department is created.

(2) All powers, duties,
and functions vested by law in the department of transportation, the
transportation commission, and the secretary of transportation, related to the
Washington state ferry system, are transferred to the jurisdiction of the
department, except those powers, duties, and functions that are expressly
directed elsewhere by law.

(3) The board of
pilotage commissioners is transferred to the jurisdiction of the department for
its staff support and administration. Nothing in this section transfers
policy-making powers of the board of pilotage commissioners to the Washington
state ferries department.

(4) All references to
the secretary of transportation or department of transportation as they pertain
to Washington state ferries in the Revised Code of Washington mean the director
of Washington state ferries or the Washington state ferries department when
referring to the functions transferred in this section.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
4. (1) The department shall
submit an annual report no later than December 20th of each year to the
governor and chairs of the transportation committees of the senate and house of
representatives with a copy to the staff of each of the committees, including
but not limited to operational and construction activities of the preceding
fiscal period as the department deems important and recommendations for future
operations of the department.

(2) The department
shall report at least annually to the transportation accountability board
regarding:

(a) Progress towards
meeting benchmarks set by the transportation accountability board;

(b) Short-term and
long-term capital and operational needs and plans to meet those needs; and

(c) Analysis of how
budget proposals made by the department further progress towards benchmarks and
related transportation policies.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
5. The director is the
executive head and appointing authority of the department. The governor shall
appoint the director, with the consent of the senate, and the director serves
at the pleasure of the governor. If a vacancy occurs in the position while the
senate is not in session, the governor shall make a temporary appointment until
the next meeting of the senate. A temporary director may not serve more than
one year.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
6. It is the intent of the
legislature wherever possible to place the internal affairs of the department
under the control of the director in order that the director may institute the
flexible, alert, and intelligent management of department business that
changing contemporary circumstances require. Therefore, whenever the
director's authority is not specifically limited by law, the director has
complete charge and supervisory powers over the department. The director may
create such administrative structures as the director considers appropriate,
except as otherwise specified by law. The director may employ such assistants
and personnel as may be necessary for the general administration of the
department. This employment must be in accordance with the state civil service
law, chapter 41.06 RCW, except as otherwise provided.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
7. The department may be
subdivided into divisions. Except as otherwise specified or as federal
requirements may differently require, these divisions must be established and
organized in accordance with plans to be prepared by the director and approved
by the governor. In preparing the plans, the director shall endeavor to
promote efficient public management, to improve programs, and to take full
advantage of the economies, both fiscal and administrative, to be gained from
the consolidation of functions and agencies under this chapter.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
8. The director shall
appoint a deputy director, and such assistant directors as may be needed to
administer the department. The deputy director has charge and general
supervision of the department in the absence or disability of the director and,
in case of a vacancy in the office of director, will continue in charge of the
department until a successor is appointed and qualified, or until the governor
appoints an acting director.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
9. The director may delegate
any power or duty vested in or transferred to the director by law or executive
order to the deputy director or to any other assistant or subordinate; but the
director remains responsible for the official acts of the officers and
employees of the department.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
10. (1) The director may
appoint such advisory committees or councils as may be required by federal
legislation as a condition to the receipt of federal funds by the department.
The director may also appoint statewide committees or councils on subject
matters that are or come within the department's responsibilities. The
statewide committees and councils must have representation from both major
political parties and substantial consumer representation. The committees or
councils must be constituted as required by federal law or as the director
determines.

Members of the state
advisory committees or councils may be reimbursed for their travel expenses in
accordance with RCW 43.03.050 and 43.03.060.

(2) Councils appointed
by the director must include but not be limited to a tariff policy committee.
The tariff policy committee shall advise and assist the director in setting
ferry tariff policy.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
11. In furtherance of the
policy of the state to cooperate with the federal government in all programs
under the jurisdiction of the department, the director shall adopt rules that
become necessary to entitle the state to participate in federal funds, unless
expressly prohibited by law. Any internal reorganization carried out under the
terms of this chapter must meet federal requirements that are a necessary
condition for state receipt of federal funds. Any section or provision of law
dealing with the department that may be susceptible to more than one
construction must be interpreted in favor of the construction most likely to
comply with federal laws entitling this state to receive federal funds for the
various programs of the department. If any law dealing with the department is
ruled to be in conflict with federal requirements that are a prescribed
condition of the allocation of federal funds to the state, or to any
departments or agencies thereof, the conflicting part is declared to be
inoperative solely to the extent of the conflict.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
12. A new section is added
to chapter 41.06 RCW to read as follows:

In addition to the
exemptions under RCW 41.06.070, this chapter does not apply in the Washington
state ferries department to the director, the director's personal secretary,
the deputy director, all assistant directors, and one confidential secretary
for each of these officers.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
13. All reports, documents,
surveys, books, records, files, papers, or written material in the possession
of the department of transportation pertaining to the powers, functions, and
duties transferred must be delivered to the custody of the Washington state
ferries department. All cabinets, furniture, office equipment, motor vehicles,
and other tangible property employed in connection with the powers, duties, and
functions transferred must be made available to the Washington state ferries
department. All funds, credits, or other assets held in connection with the
powers, duties, and functions transferred must be assigned to the Washington
state ferries department.

Any appropriations made
in connection with the powers, duties, and functions transferred are, on the
effective date of this act, transferred and credited to the Washington state
ferries department.

Whenever any question
arises as to the transfer of any personnel, funds, books, documents, records,
papers, files, equipment, or other tangible property used or held in the
exercise of the powers and the performance of the duties and functions
transferred, or as to the powers, duties, and functions transferred, the
director of financial management shall make a determination as to the proper
allocation and certify the determination to the state agencies concerned.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
14. All classified employees
employed in connection with the powers, duties, and functions transferred are
transferred to the jurisdiction of the Washington state ferries department.
All employees classified under chapter 41.06 RCW, the state civil service law,
are assigned to the Washington state ferries department to perform their usual
duties upon the same terms as formerly, without any loss of rights, subject to
any action that may be appropriate after the assignment in accordance with the
laws and rules governing state civil service.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
15. All rules and all pending
business before any agency of state government pertaining to the powers,
duties, and functions transferred must be continued and acted upon by the
Washington state ferries department. All existing contracts and obligations
remain in full force and must be performed by the Washington state ferries
department.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
16. The transfer of the
powers, duties, functions, and personnel does not affect the validity of any
act performed by the employee before the effective date of this act.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
17. If apportionments of
budgeted funds are required because of the transfers directed by sections 13
through 16 of this act, the director of financial management shall certify the
apportionments to the agencies affected, the state auditor, and the state
treasurer. Each of these shall make the appropriate transfer and adjustments
in funds and appropriation accounts and equipment records in accordance with
the certification.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
18. Nothing contained in
sections 13 through 16 of this act alters any existing collective bargaining
unit or the provisions of any existing collective bargaining agreement until
the agreement has expired or until the bargaining unit has been modified by
action of the personnel board as provided by law.

Sec. 19. RCW 43.17.010 and 1993
sp.s. c 2 s 16, 1993 c 472 s 17, and 1993 c 280 s 18 are each reenacted and
amended to read as follows:

There shall be
departments of the state government which shall be known as (1) the department
of social and health services, (2) the department of ecology, (3) the
department of labor and industries, (4) the department of agriculture, (5) the
department of fish and wildlife, (6) the department of transportation, (7) the
department of licensing, (8) the department of general administration, (9) the
department of community, trade, and economic development, (10) the department
of veterans affairs, (11) the department of revenue, (12) the department of
retirement systems, (13) the department of corrections, ((and)) (14) the
department of health, ((and)) (15) the department of financial
institutions, and (16) the Washington state ferries department, which
shall be charged with the execution, enforcement, and administration of such
laws, and invested with such powers and required to perform such duties, as the
legislature may provide.

Sec. 20. RCW 43.17.020 and 1995
1st sp.s. c 2 s 2 are each amended to read as follows:

There shall be a chief
executive officer of each department to be known as: (1) The secretary of
social and health services, (2) the director of ecology, (3) the director of
labor and industries, (4) the director of agriculture, (5) the director of fish
and wildlife, (6) the secretary of transportation, (7) the director of
licensing, (8) the director of general administration, (9) the director of
community, trade, and economic development, (10) the director of veterans
affairs, (11) the director of revenue, (12) the director of retirement systems,
(13) the secretary of corrections, ((and)) (14) the secretary of health,
((and)) (15) the director of financial institutions, and (16) the
director of Washington state ferries.

Such officers, except
the secretary of transportation and the director of fish and wildlife, shall be
appointed by the governor, with the consent of the senate, and hold office at
the pleasure of the governor. The secretary of transportation shall be
appointed by the transportation commission as prescribed by RCW 47.01.041. The
director of fish and wildlife shall be appointed by the fish and wildlife
commission as prescribed by RCW 77.04.055.

Sec. 21. RCW 46.68.090 and 1999 c
269 s 2 and 1999 c 94 s 6 are each reenacted and amended to read as follows:

(1) All moneys that
have accrued or may accrue to the motor vehicle fund from the motor vehicle
fuel tax and special fuel tax shall be first expended for purposes enumerated
in (a) and (b) of this subsection. The remaining net tax amount shall be
distributed monthly by the state treasurer in the proportions set forth in (c)
through (l) of this subsection.

(a) For payment of
refunds of motor vehicle fuel tax and special fuel tax that has been paid and
is refundable as provided by law;

(b) For payment of
amounts to be expended pursuant to appropriations for the administrative
expenses of the offices of state treasurer, state auditor, and the department
of licensing of the state of Washington in the administration of the motor
vehicle fuel tax and the special fuel tax, which sums shall be distributed monthly;

(c) For distribution to
the motor vehicle fund an amount equal to ((44.387)) 28.5602
percent to be expended for highway purposes of the state as defined in RCW
46.68.130;

(d) For distribution to
the special category C account, hereby created in the motor vehicle fund, an
amount equal to 3.2609 percent to be expended for special category C projects.
Special category C projects are category C projects that, due to high cost
only, will require bond financing to complete construction.

The following criteria,
listed in order of priority, shall be used in determining which special
category C projects have the highest priority:

(i) Accident
experience;

(ii) Fatal accident
experience;

(iii) Capacity to move
people and goods safely and at reasonable speeds without undue congestion; and

(iv) Continuity of
development of the highway transportation network.

Moneys deposited in the
special category C account in the motor vehicle fund may be used for payment of
debt service on bonds the proceeds of which are used to finance special
category C projects under this subsection (1)(d);

(e) For distribution to
the Puget Sound ferry operations account in the motor vehicle fund an amount
equal to ((2.3283)) 5.1116 percent;

(f) For distribution to
the Puget Sound capital construction account in the motor vehicle fund an
amount equal to ((2.3726)) 15.4161 percent;

(g) For distribution to
the urban arterial trust account in the motor vehicle fund an amount equal to
7.5597 percent;

(h) For distribution to
the transportation improvement account in the motor vehicle fund an amount
equal to 5.6739 percent and expended in accordance with RCW 47.26.086;

(i) For distribution to
the cities and towns from the motor vehicle fund an amount equal to 10.6961
percent in accordance with RCW 46.68.110;

(j) For distribution to
the counties from the motor vehicle fund an amount equal to 19.2287 percent:
(i) Out of which there shall be distributed from time to time, as directed by
the department of transportation, those sums as may be necessary to carry out
the provisions of RCW 47.56.725; and (ii) less any amounts appropriated to the
county road administration board to implement the provisions of RCW
47.56.725(4), with the balance of such county share to be distributed monthly
as the same accrues for distribution in accordance with RCW 46.68.120;

(k) For distribution to
the county arterial preservation account, hereby created in the motor vehicle
fund an amount equal to 1.9565 percent. These funds shall be distributed by
the county road administration board to counties in proportions corresponding
to the number of paved arterial lane miles in the unincorporated area of each
county and shall be used for improvements to sustain the structural, safety,
and operational integrity of county arterials. The county road administration
board shall adopt reasonable rules and develop policies to implement this
program and to assure that a pavement management system is used;

(l) For distribution to
the rural arterial trust account in the motor vehicle fund an amount equal to
2.5363 percent and expended in accordance with RCW 36.79.020.

(2) Nothing in this
section or in RCW 46.68.130 may be construed so as to violate any terms or
conditions contained in any highway construction bond issues now or hereafter
authorized by statute and whose payment is by such statute pledged to be paid
from any excise taxes on motor vehicle fuel and special fuels.

Sec. 22. RCW 47.01.081 and 1984 c
48 s 1 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) Initially the
department shall be organized into divisions, including the division of
highways, the division of public transportation, the division of aeronautics,
((the division of marine transportation,)) and the division of
transportation planning and budget.

(2) The secretary may
reorganize divisions in order to attain the maximum possible efficiency in the
operation of the department. Each division shall be headed by an assistant
secretary to be appointed by the secretary. The secretary may also appoint a
deputy secretary as may be needed for the performance of the duties and
functions vested in the department and may also appoint up to twelve ferry
system management positions as defined in RCW 47.64.011. The secretary may
delegate to officers within the several divisions of the department authority
to employ personnel necessary to discharge the responsibilities of the
department.

(3) The officers
appointed under this section shall be exempt from the provisions of the state
civil service law and shall be paid salaries to be fixed by the governor in
accordance with the procedure established by law for the fixing of salaries for
officers exempt from the operation of the state civil service law.

Sec. 23. RCW 47.64.011 and 1983 c
15 s 2 are each amended to read as follows:

As used in this
chapter, unless the context otherwise requires, the definitions in this section
shall apply.

(1)
"Arbitration" means the procedure whereby the parties involved in an
impasse submit their differences to a third party for a final and binding decision
or as provided in this chapter.

(2)
"Arbitrator" means either a single arbitrator or a panel of three
arbitrators as provided in RCW 47.64.240.

(3) "Collective
bargaining representative" means the persons designated by the ((secretary
of transportation)) governor and employee organizations to be the
exclusive representatives during collective bargaining negotiations.

(4) (("Department
of transportation" means the department as defined in RCW 47.01.021.

(5))) "Ferry employee" means any employee
of the ((marine transportation division of the department of transportation))
Washington state ferries department who is a member of a collective
bargaining unit represented by a ferry employee organization and does not
include an exempt employee pursuant to RCW 41.06.079.

(((6))) (5)
"Ferry employee organization" means any labor organization recognized
to represent a collective bargaining unit of ferry employees.

(((7))) (6)
"Ferry system management" means those management personnel of the ((marine
transportation division of the department of transportation)) Washington
state ferries department who have been vested with the day-to-day
management responsibilities of the Washington state ferry system by the ((transportation
commission)) director of Washington state ferries and who are not
members of a collective bargaining unit represented by a ferry employee
organization.

(((8))) (7)
"Lockout" means the refusal of ferry system management to furnish
work to ferry employees in an effort to get ferry employee organizations to
make concessions during collective bargaining, grievance, or other labor
relation negotiations. Curtailment of employment of ferry employees due to
lack of work resulting from a strike or work stoppage, as defined in subsection
(11) of this section, shall not be considered a lockout.

(((9))) (8)
"Marine employees' commission" means the commission created in RCW
47.64.280.

(((10))) (9)
"Office of financial management" means the office as created in RCW
43.41.050.

(((11))) (10)
"Strike or work stoppage" means a ferry employee's refusal, in
concerted action with others, to report to duty, or his or her willful
absence from his or her position, or his or her stoppage or slowdown of work,
or his or her abstinence in whole or in part from the full, faithful, and
proper performance of the duties of employment, for the purpose of inducing,
influencing, or coercing a change in conditions, compensation, rights,
privileges, or obligations of his, her, or any other ferry employee's
employment. A refusal, in good faith, to work under conditions which pose an
endangerment to the health and safety of ferry employees or the public, as
determined by the master of the vessel, shall not be considered a strike for
the purposes of this chapter.

(((12)
"Transportation commission" means the commission as defined in RCW
47.01.021.))

(11)
"Washington state ferries department" means the department as defined
in section 2 of this act.

Sec. 24. RCW 88.16.010 and 1991 c
200 s 1001 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) The board of
pilotage commissioners of the state of Washington is ((hereby)) created
((and shall consist of the assistant secretary of marine transportation of
the department of transportation of the state)), consisting of the
director of Washington state ferries, or the ((assistant
secretary's)) director's designee, who ((shall)) must
be an employee of the ((marine division)) Washington state ferries
department, who shall be chairperson, the administrator of the ((office
of marine safety)) integrated oil spill prevention and response program,
or the administrator's designee, and seven members appointed by the governor
and confirmed by the senate. Each of the appointed commissioners shall be
appointed for a term of four years from the date of the member's commission.
No person shall be eligible for appointment to the board unless that person is
at the time of appointment eighteen years of age or over and a citizen of the
United States and of the state of Washington. Two of the appointed
commissioners shall be pilots licensed under this chapter and actively engaged
in piloting upon the waters covered by this chapter for at least three years
immediately preceding the time of appointment and while serving on the board.
One pilot shall be from the Puget Sound pilotage district and one shall be from
the Grays Harbor pilotage district. Two of the appointed commissioners shall
be actively engaged in the ownership, operation, or management of deep sea
cargo and/or passenger carrying vessels for at least three years immediately
preceding the time of appointment and while serving on the board. One of said
shipping commissioners shall be a representative of American and one of foreign
shipping. One of the commissioners shall be a representative from a recognized
environmental organization concerned with marine waters. The remaining
commissioners shall be persons interested in and concerned with pilotage,
maritime safety, and marine affairs, with broad experience related to the
maritime industry exclusive of experience as either a state licensed pilot or
as a shipping representative.

(2) Any vacancy in an
appointed position on the board shall be filled by the governor for the
remainder of the unfilled term, subject to confirmation by the senate.

(3) Five members of the
board shall constitute a quorum. At least one pilot, one shipping
representative, and one public member must be present at every meeting. All
commissioners and the chairperson shall have a vote.

Sec. 25. RCW 47.60.010 and 1984 c
18 s 1 are each amended to read as follows:

The department is
authorized to acquire by lease, charter, contract, purchase, condemnation, or
construction, and partly by any or all of such means, and to thereafter
operate, improve, and extend, a system of ferries on and crossing Puget Sound
and any of its tributary waters and connections thereof, and connecting with
the public streets and highways in the state. The system of ferries shall
include such boats, vessels, wharves, docks, approaches, landings, franchises,
licenses, and appurtenances as shall be determined by the department to be
necessary or desirable for efficient operation of the ferry system and best
serve the public. ((The department may in like manner acquire by purchase,
condemnation, or construction and include in the ferry system such toll
bridges, approaches, and connecting roadways as may be deemed by the department
advantageous in channeling traffic to points served by the ferry system.))
In addition to the powers of acquisition granted by this section, the
department is empowered to enter into any contracts, agreements, or leases with
any person, firm, or corporation and to thereby provide, on such terms and
conditions as it shall determine, for the operation of any ferry or ferries or
system thereof, whether acquired by the department or not.

The authority of the
department to sell and lease back any state ferry, for federal tax purposes
only, as authorized by 26 U.S.C., Sec. 168(f)(8) is confirmed. Legal title and
all incidents of legal title to any ferry sold and leased back (except for the
federal tax benefits attributable to the ownership thereof) shall remain in the
state of Washington.

Sec. 26. RCW 47.60.013 and 1981 c
341 s 1 are each amended to read as follows:

The governor is
authorized to take such actions as may be necessary to insure the continued
operation of the Puget Sound ferry ((and toll bridge)) system under any
emergency circumstances which threaten the continued operation of the system.
In the event of such an emergency, the governor may assume all the powers granted
by law to the ((transportation commission and department of transportation))
Washington state ferries department with respect to the ferry system.
In addition, notwithstanding the provisions of chapters 47.60 and 47.64 RCW,
the governor may contract with any qualified persons for the operation of the
Washington state ferry system, or any part thereof, or for ferry service to be
provided by privately owned vessels. Administrative costs to the office of the
governor incurred in the exercise of this authority shall be reimbursed by the
department.

Sec. 27. RCW 47.60.040 and 1984 c
7 s 300 are each amended to read as follows:

For the purpose of
obtaining information for the consideration of the department upon the acquisition
of any ferries or ferry facilities ((or the construction of any toll bridge
under this chapter)), the department shall make any examination,
investigation, survey, or reconnaissance for the determination of material
facts pertaining thereto.

The cost of any such
examination, investigation, survey, or reconnaissance, and all preliminary
expenses leading up to and resulting in the issuance of any revenue bonds
including, but not being limited to expenses in making surveys and appraisals
and the drafting, printing, issuance, and sale of bonds under this chapter
shall be borne by the department out of the ((motor vehicle fund. All such
costs and expenses as well as any thereof heretofore incurred shall be
reimbursed to the motor vehicle fund out of any proceeds derived from the sale
of bonds or out of tolls and revenues to be derived by the department through
its operations hereunder)) Puget Sound capital construction account.

Sec. 28. RCW 47.60.060 and 1984 c
7 s 302 are each amended to read as follows:

For the purpose of
paying the cost of acquiring by lease, charter, contract, purchase,
condemnation, or construction all or any part of such Puget Sound ferry system,
((including toll bridges, approaches, and roadways incidental thereto,))
and for rehabilitating, rebuilding, enlarging, or improving all or any part of
the system, the department is authorized by resolution to issue its revenue
bonds which shall constitute obligations only of the department and shall be
payable solely and only from all or such part of the revenues from the
operation of the system as may be provided in and by the resolution.

Each revenue bond shall
contain a recital that payment or redemption of the bond and payment of the
interest thereon is secured by a direct charge and lien upon the tolls and
revenues pledged for that purpose and that the bond does not constitute an
indebtedness of the state of Washington.

The department is
empowered to include in any resolution authorizing the issuance of the bonds
such covenants, stipulations, and conditions as may be deemed necessary with
respect to the continued use and application of the income and revenues from
the undertaking.

The revenue bonds may
bear such date or dates, may mature at such time or times as the department
determines, may bear interest at such rate or rates, may be in such
denomination or denominations, may be in such form, either coupon or
registered, may carry such registration and conversion privileges, may be made
subject to such terms of redemption with or without premium, and may contain
such other terms and covenants not inconsistent with this chapter as may be
provided in the resolution. Notwithstanding the form or tenor thereof, and in
the absence of an express recital on the face thereof that the bond is
nonnegotiable, each such revenue bond shall at all times be and shall be treated
as a negotiable instrument for all purposes. All such bonds shall be signed by
the state treasurer and countersigned by the governor, and any interest coupons
appertaining thereto shall bear the signature of the state treasurer. The
countersignature of the governor on the bonds and the signature of the state
treasurer on the coupons may be their printed or lithographed facsimile
signatures.

Pending the issuance of
definitive bonds, temporary or interim bonds, certificates, or receipts of any
denomination and with or without coupons attached may be issued as may be
provided by the resolution.

Sec. 29. RCW 47.60.113 and 1984 c
7 s 305 are each amended to read as follows:

The department is
authorized to refund, at the maturity thereof, or before the maturity thereof
if they are subject to call prior to maturity or if all of the holders thereof
consent thereto, upon such terms and conditions as it deems best, any or all of
its revenue bonds now or hereafter outstanding, issued for the purpose of
acquiring, constructing, or reconstructing ((any toll bridge, toll road,
toll tunnel,)) the ferry system, ((or any other toll facility of
any sort,)) or issued for the purpose of refunding such bonds, which
revenue bonds are payable out of all or part of the revenues of the ((toll
facility)) ferry system. Refunding bonds may be issued hereunder in
a sufficient amount to provide additional funds for acquiring, constructing,
reconstructing, rehabilitating, rebuilding, enlarging, or improving ((any
toll bridge, toll road, toll tunnel,)) the ferry system, ((or any
other toll facility of any sort,)) and to pay all refunding costs and
expenses and to provide adequate reserves ((for the toll facility and))
for any such refunding bonds. Various issues and series of such outstanding
bonds, including refunding bonds, may be combined and refunded by a single
issue of refunding bonds. The refunding bonds shall bear interest at such
rates and mature at such times, without limitation by the interest rates or
maturity of the bonds being refunded, and shall contain such other covenants
and conditions as the department determines by resolution.

Sec. 30. RCW 47.60.114 and 1984 c
7 s 306 are each amended to read as follows:

Any
refunding bonds authorized by this chapter constitute obligations of the
department only and not of the state of Washington. They shall be payable
solely out of all or such part of the revenues derived from the operation of
the ((toll bridge, toll road, toll tunnel,)) ferry system((, or any
other toll facility,)) as shall be provided in the resolution authorizing
the issuance of the refunding bonds.

Sec. 31. RCW 47.60.120 and 1993 c
427 s 1 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) If the ((department))
state acquires or constructs, maintains, and operates any ferry
crossings upon or toll bridges over Puget Sound or any of its tributary or
connecting waters, there shall not be constructed, operated, or maintained any
other ferry crossing upon or bridge over any such waters within ten miles of
any such crossing or bridge operated or maintained by the ((department))
state excepting such bridges or ferry crossings in existence, and being
operated and maintained under a lawfully issued franchise at the time of the
location of the ferry crossing or construction of the toll bridge by the
department.

(2) The ten-mile
distance in subsection (1) of this section means ten statute miles measured by
airline distance. The ten-mile restriction shall be applied by comparing the
two end points (termini) of a state ferry crossing to those of a private ferry
crossing.

(3) The Washington
utilities and transportation commission may, upon written petition of a
commercial ferry operator certificated or applying for certification under
chapter 81.84 RCW, and upon notice and hearing, grant a waiver from the
ten-mile restriction. The waiver must not be detrimental to the public
interest. In making a decision to waive the ten-mile restriction, the commission
shall consider, but is not limited to, the impact of the waiver on
transportation congestion mitigation, air quality improvement, and the overall
impact on the Washington state ferry system. The commission shall act upon a
request for a waiver within ninety days after the conclusion of the hearing. A
waiver is effective for a period of five years from the date of issuance. At
the end of five years the waiver becomes permanent unless appealed within
thirty days by the commission on its own motion, the department, or an
interested party.

(4) The ((department))
state shall not maintain and operate any ferry crossing or toll bridge
over Puget Sound or any of its tributary or connecting waters that would
infringe upon any franchise lawfully issued by the state and in existence and
being exercised at the time of the location of the ferry crossing or toll
bridge by the ((department)) state, without first acquiring the
rights granted to such franchise holder under the franchise.

Sec. 32. RCW 47.60.130 and 1979
ex.s. c 189 s 6 are each amended to read as follows:

((Such ferry system,
including any toll bridges, approaches, and roadways incidental thereto, may be
financed and operated in combination or separately as one or more units as the
department of transportation may determine, and such ferry system together with
any toll bridge hereafter constructed by the department upon or across the
waters of Puget Sound or Hood Canal, or any part of either, replacing one or
more presently operated ferry routes, is declared to be a continuous project
within the meaning of RCW 47.56.070.)) The department ((is empowered to))
may rent, lease, or charter any property acquired under this chapter.
If the department determines that any real property (including lands,
improvements thereon, and any interests or estates) originally acquired for the
ferry system is no longer required for the purposes of the ferry system, the
department shall offer it for sale in the manner and with the authority
authorized to the department by RCW 47.12.063 or 47.12.283. The ((secretary
of transportation)) director may adopt rules further implementing
this section. The proceeds of all such sales shall be paid into the separate
trust fund of the state treasury established pursuant to RCW 47.60.150.

Sec. 33. RCW 47.60.135 and 1997 c
323 s 2 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) The charter use of
Washington State Ferry vessels when established route operations and normal
user requirements are not disrupted is permissible.

(2) Consistent with the
policy as established in subsection (1) of this section, the ((general
manager)) director of the Washington State Ferries may approve
agreements for the chartering of Washington State Ferry vessels to groups or
individuals, including hazardous material transporters, in accordance with the
following:

(a) Vessels may be
committed to charter only when established route operation and normal user
requirements are not disrupted or inconvenienced. If a vessel is engaged in
the transport of hazardous materials, the transporter shall pay for all legs
necessary to complete the charter, even if the vessel is simultaneously engaged
in an operational voyage on behalf of Washington State Ferries.

(b) Charter rates for
vessels must be established at actual vessel operating costs plus fifty percent
of such actual costs rounded to the nearest fifty dollars. Actual vessel
operating costs include, but are not limited to, all labor, fuel, and vessel
maintenance costs incurred due to the charter agreement, including deadheading
and standby.

(c) Recognizing the
need for stabilized charter rates in order to encourage use of vessels, rates
must be established and revised July 1st of each year and must remain fixed for
a one-year period unless actual vessel operating costs increase five percent or
more within that year, in which case the charter rates must be revised in
accordance with (b) of this subsection.

(d) All charter
agreements must be in writing and substantially in the form of (e) of this
subsection and available, with calculations, for inspection by the legislature
and the public.

(e) Parties chartering
Washington State Ferry vessels shall comply with all applicable laws, rules,
and regulations during the charter voyage, and failure to so comply is cause
for immediate termination of the charter voyage.

"CHARTER
CRUISE AGREEMENT

On this
. . . . day of . . . ., . . . .,
Washington State Ferries (WSF) and . . . . ., hereinafter
called Lessee, enter into this agreement for rental of a ferry vessel for the
purpose of a charter voyage to be held on . . . . ., the
parties agree as follows:

1. WSF agrees to supply
the vessel . . . . . (subject to change) for the use of the
Lessee from the period from . . . . . to
. . . . . on . . . . . (date).

2. The maximum number
of passengers; or in the case of hazardous materials transports, trucks and
trailers; that will be accommodated on the assigned vessel is
. . . . .. This number MAY NOT be exceeded.

3. The
voyage will originate at . . . . ., and the route of travel
during the voyage will be as follows:

.................................................................

4. The charge for the
above voyage is . . . . . dollars ($ . . .) plus
a property damage deposit of $350 for a total price of $
. . . ., to be paid by cashier's check three working days before
the date of the voyage at the offices of the WSF at Seattle Ferry Terminal,
Pier 52, Seattle, Washington 98104. The Lessee remains responsible for
property damage in excess of $350.

5. WSF is responsible
only for the navigational operation of the chartered ferry and in no way is
responsible for directing voyage activities, providing equipment, or any food
service.

6. Other than for
hazardous materials transport, the voyage activities must be conducted
exclusively on the passenger decks of the assigned ferry. Voyage patrons will
not be permitted to enter the pilot house or the engine room, nor shall the
vehicle decks be used for any purpose other than loading or unloading of voyage
patrons or hazardous materials.

7. If the Lessee or any
of the voyage patrons will possess or consume alcoholic beverages aboard the vessel,
the Lessee must obtain the appropriate licenses or permits from the Washington
State Liquor Control Board. The Lessee must furnish copies of any necessary
licenses or permits to WSF at the same time payment for the voyage is made.
Failure to comply with applicable laws, rules, and regulations of appropriate
State and Federal agencies is cause for immediate termination of the voyage,
and WSF shall retain all payments made as liquidated damages.

8. WSF is not obligated
to provide shoreside parking for the vehicles belonging to voyage patrons.

9. The Lessee
recognizes that the primary function of the WSF is for the cross-Sound
transportation of the public and the maintaining of the existing schedule. The
Lessee recognizes therefore the right of WSF to cancel a voyage commitment
without liability to the Lessee due to unforeseen circumstances or events that
require the use of the chartered vessel on its scheduled route operations. In
the event of such a cancellation, WSF agrees to refund the entire amount of the
charter fee to the Lessee.

10. The Lessee agrees
to hold WSF harmless from, and shall process and defend at its own expense, all
claims, demands, or suits at law or equity, of whatever nature brought against
WSF arising in whole or in part from the performance of provisions of this
agreement. This indemnity provision does not require the Lessee to defend or
indemnify WSF against any action based solely on the alleged negligence of WSF.

11. This writing is the
full agreement between the parties.

. . . . . . . . . . . . .
WASHINGTON STATE FERRIES

Lessee

By:
. . . . . . . . . . By:
. . . . . . . . . . . .

((General
Manager))

Director
or Director's designee"

Sec. 34. RCW 47.60.140 and 1995
1st sp.s. c 4 s 2 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) The department is
empowered to operate such ferry system, including all operations, whether
intrastate or international, upon any route or routes, ((and toll bridges))
as a revenue-producing and self-liquidating undertaking. The department has
full charge of the construction, rehabilitation, rebuilding, enlarging,
improving, operation, and maintenance of the ferry system, ((including toll
bridges, approaches, and roadways incidental thereto that may be authorized by
the department,)) including the collection of tolls and other charges for
the services and facilities of the undertaking. The department has the
exclusive right to enter into leases and contracts for use and occupancy by
other parties of the concessions and space located on the ferries, wharves,
docks, approaches, and landings, but, except as provided in subsection (2) of
this section, no such leases or contracts may be entered into for more than ten
years, nor without a competitive contract process, except as otherwise provided
in this section. The competitive process shall be either an invitation for
bids in accordance with the process established by chapter 43.19 RCW, or a
request for proposals in accordance with the process established by RCW
47.56.030.

(2) As part of a joint
development agreement under which a public or private developer constructs or
installs improvements on ferry system property, the department may lease all or
part of such property and improvements to such developers for that period of
time, not to exceed fifty-five years, or not to exceed thirty years for those
areas located within harbor areas, which the department determines is necessary
to allow the developer to make reasonable recovery on its initial investment.
Any lease entered into as provided for in this subsection that involves state
aquatic lands shall conform with the Washington state Constitution and
applicable statutory requirements as determined by the department of natural
resources. That portion of the lease rate attributable to the state aquatic
lands shall be distributed in the same manner as other lease revenues derived
from state aquatic lands as provided in RCW 79.24.580.

Sec. 35. RCW 47.60.145 and 1982 c
210 s 1 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) An "historic
ferry" is any vessel in the Washington state ferries fleet which has been
listed in the Washington state register of historic places.

(2) When the Washington
state ferries department ((of transportation)) determines that an
historic ferry is surplus to the needs of Washington state ferries, the
department shall call for proposals from persons who wish to acquire the
historic ferry. Proposals for the acquisition of an historic ferry shall be
accepted only from persons or organizations that (a) are a governmental entity
or a nonprofit corporation or association dedicated to the preservation of
historic properties; (b) agree to a contract approved by the state historic
preservation officer, which requires the preservation and maintenance of the
historic ferry and provides that title to the ferry reverts to the state if the
((secretary of transportation)) director of Washington state ferries
determines that the contract has been violated; and (c) demonstrate the
administrative and financial ability successfully to comply with the contract.

(3) The Washington
state ferries department shall evaluate the qualifying proposals and
shall select the proposal which is most advantageous to the state. Factors to
be considered in making the selection shall include but not be limited to:

(a) Extent and quality
of restoration;

(b) Retention of
original design and use;

(c) Public access to
the vessel;

(d) Provisions for
historical interpretation;

(e) Monetary return to
the state.

(4) If there are no
qualifying proposals, an historic ferry shall be disposed of in the manner
provided by state law.

Sec. 36. RCW 47.60.150 and 1999 c
94 s 26 are each amended to read as follows:

Subject to the
provisions of RCW 47.60.326, the schedule of charges for the services and
facilities of the system shall be fixed and revised from time to time by the ((commission))
director of Washington state ferries so that the tolls and other
revenues deposited in the Puget Sound ferry operations account for maintenance
and operation, and all moneys in the Puget Sound capital construction account
available for debt service will yield annual revenue and income sufficient,
after allowance for all operating, maintenance, and repair expenses to pay the
interest and principal and sinking fund charges for all outstanding revenue
bonds, and to create and maintain a fund for ordinary renewals and
replacements: PROVIDED, That if provision is made by any resolution for the
issuance of revenue bonds for the creation and maintenance of a special fund
for rehabilitating, rebuilding, enlarging, or improving all or any part of the
ferry system then such schedule of tolls and rates of charges shall be fixed
and revised so that the revenue and income will also be sufficient to comply
with such provision.

All income and revenues
as collected shall be paid to the state treasurer for the account of the
department and deposited into the Puget Sound ferry operations account. ((Nothing
in this section requires tolls on the Hood Canal bridge except as may be
required by any bond covenants.))

Sec. 37. RCW 47.60.310 and 1988 c
100 s 1 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) The department is
further directed to conduct such review by soliciting and obtaining expressions
from local community groups in order to be properly informed as to problems
being experienced within the area served by the Washington state ferries. ((In
order that local representation may be established, the department shall give
prior notice of the review to the ferry advisory committees.))

(2) ((The legislative
authorities of San Juan, Skagit, Clallam, and Jefferson counties shall each
appoint a committee to consist of five members to serve as an advisory
committee to the department or its designated representative in such review.
The legislative authorities of other counties that contain ferry terminals
shall appoint ferry advisory committees consisting of three members for each
terminal area in each county, except for Vashon Island, which shall have one
committee, and its members shall be appointed by the Vashon/Maury Island
community council. At least one person appointed to each ferry advisory
committee shall be representative of an established ferry user group or of
frequent users of the ferry system. Each member shall reside in the vicinity
of the terminal that the advisory committee represents.)) A ferry
advisory committee must be assembled to provide citizen input to the Washington
state ferries department regarding the operation of the ferry system. The
ferry advisory committee members will be comprised of:

(a) One member from
San Juan county, to be appointed by the San Juan county legislative authority;

(b) One member from
Skagit county, to be appointed by the Skagit county legislative authority;

(c) One member from
Island county, to be appointed by the Island county legislative authority;

(d) Two members from
Kitsap county, to be appointed by the Kitsap county legislative authority;

(e) One member from
Vashon Island, to be appointed by the Vashon/Maury Island community council.

(3)((The members of
the San Juan, Clallam, and Jefferson county ferry advisory committees shall be
appointed for four-year terms. The initial terms shall commence on July 1,
1982, and end on June 30, 1986 Any vacancy shall be filled for the remainder
of the unexpired term by the appointing authority. At least one person
appointed to the advisory committee shall be representative of an established
ferry-user group or of frequent users of the ferry system, at least one shall
be representative of persons or firms using or depending upon the ferry system
for commerce, and one member shall be representative of a local government
planning body or its staff. Every member shall be a resident of the county
upon whose advisory committee he or she sits, and not more than three members
shall at the time of their appointment be members of the same major political
party.

(4))) The members of ((each terminal area)) the
ferry advisory committee shall be appointed for four-year terms. The
initial terms of the members of each terminal area committee shall be staggered
as follows: All terms shall commence September 1, ((1988)) 2001,
with ((one)) two member's terms expiring August 31, ((1990))
2003, ((one)) two member's terms expiring August
31, ((1991)) 2004, and the remaining member's terms
expiring August 31, ((1992)) 2005. Any vacancy shall be filled
for the remainder of the unexpired term by the appointing authority. ((Not
more than two members of any terminal-area committee may be from the same
political party at the time of their appointment, and in a county having more
than one committee,)) The overall political party
representation shall be as nearly equal as possible.

(((5) The chairmen
of the several committees constitute an executive committee of the Washington
state ferry users. The executive committee shall meet twice each year with
representatives of the marine division of the department to review ferry system
issues.

(6))) (4) The committee((s to be appointed
by the county legislative authorities)) members shall serve without
fee or compensation. Committee members are entitled to
reimbursement of expenses as allowed under RCW 43.03.220, 43.03.050, and
43.03.060.

Sec. 38. RCW 47.60.326
and 1999 c 94 s 27 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) In order to
maintain an adequate, fair, and economically sound schedule of charges for the
transportation of passengers, vehicles, and commodities on the Washington state
ferries, the Washington state ferries department ((of transportation)),
with the assistance of the tariff policy committee, each year shall conduct
a full review of such charges.

(2) ((Prior to))
Before February 1st of each ((odd-numbered)) year the department
shall transmit ((to the transportation)) a report of its review together
with its recommendations for the revision of a schedule of charges for the
ensuing biennium to the ferry advisory committee. ((The commission
on or before July 1st of that year shall adopt as a rule, in the manner
provided by the Washington administrative procedure act, a schedule of charges
for the Washington state ferries for the ensuing biennium commencing July 1st.))
If, after consultation with the ferry advisory committee, the director of
Washington state ferries determines that an adjustment in the schedule of
charges is appropriate, the director shall adopt a new schedule of charges.

(a) The schedule of
charges must be adopted as a rule under the Washington Administrative Procedure
Act, chapter 34.05 RCW.

(b) The schedule
may initially be adopted as an emergency rule if necessary ((to take effect
on, or as near as possible to, July 1st)).

(3) The department in
making its review and formulating recommendations ((and the commission in
adopting a schedule of charges)) may consider any of the following factors:

(a) The amount of
subsidy available to the ferry system for maintenance and operation;

(b) The time and
distance of ferry runs;

(c) The maintenance and
operation costs for ferry runs with a proper adjustment for higher costs of
operating outmoded or less efficient equipment;

(d) The efficient
distribution of traffic between cross-sound routes;

(e) The desirability of
reasonable commutation rates for persons using the ferry system to commute
daily to work;

(f) The effect of
proposed fares in increasing walk-on and vehicular passenger use;

(g) The effect of
proposed fares in promoting all types of ferry use during nonpeak periods;

(h) Such other factors
as prudent managers of a major ferry system would consider.

(4) In adopting a
schedule of charges for passenger-only ferry service, the department in making
its review and formulating recommendations and the commission in adopting a
schedule of charges shall consider the factors in this subsection (4) in
addition to those factors enumerated in subsection (3) of this section. The
department and the commission shall take into account the public benefit
derived from encouraging the availability and use of passenger-only ferry
service, including but not limited to:

(a) The long-term
environmental and economic benefit from providing a reliable, reasonably priced
alternative for moving people over Washington's navigable waterways and the
resulting reduction in automobile traffic;

(b) The necessity
for up-front investment to build the passenger-only ferry service into a viable
component of the transportation choices available to Washington's citizens;

(c) The potential
savings to the state from avoided investment in cross-sound vehicular
transportation; and

(d) The stimulus to
balanced economic development to west sound and island communities served by
the ferry system.

(5) If at any
time during the biennium it appears that projected revenues from the Puget Sound
ferry operations account and any other operating subsidy available to the
Washington state ferries will be less than the projected total cost of
maintenance and operation of the Washington state ferries for the biennium, the
department shall forthwith undertake a review of its schedule of charges to
ascertain whether or not the schedule of charges should be revised. The
department shall, upon completion of its review report, submit its
recommendation to the ((transportation commission which)) ferry advisory
committee. After consultation with the ferry advisory committee, the
department may in its sound discretion revise the schedule of charges as
required to meet necessary maintenance and operation expenditures of the ferry
system for the biennium or may defer action until the regular annual review and
revision of ferry charges as provided in subsection (2) of this section.

(((5) The provisions
of RCW 47.60.330 relating to public participation shall apply to the process of
revising ferry tolls under this section.)) (6) Before a revision in the
schedule of ferry tolls or charges, the department shall consult with affected
ferry users.

Sec. 39. RCW 47.60.440
and 1999 c 94 s 28 are each amended to read as follows:

The Washington state
ferry system shall be efficiently managed, operated, and maintained as a
revenue-producing undertaking. Subject to the provisions of RCW 47.60.326 the
((commission)) Washington state ferries department shall maintain
and revise from time to time as necessary a schedule of tolls and charges on
said ferry system with other moneys deposited in the Puget Sound ferry
operations account for maintenance and operation ((and)). All
moneys in the Puget Sound capital construction account available for debt service
will produce net revenue available for debt service, in each fiscal year, in an
amount at least equal to minimum annual debt service requirements as
hereinafter provided. Minimum annual debt service requirements as used in this
section shall include required payments of principal and interest, sinking fund
requirements, and payments into reserves on all outstanding revenue bonds
authorized by RCW 47.60.400 through 47.60.470.

The provisions of law
relating to the revision of tolls and charges to meet minimum annual debt
service requirements from net revenues as required by this section shall be
binding upon the ((commission)) department but shall not be
deemed to constitute a contract to that effect for the benefit of the holders
of such bonds.

Sec. 40. RCW 47.60.450 and 1986 c
66 s 7 are each amended to read as follows:

If the net revenue
together with all moneys in the Puget Sound capital construction account
available for debt service in any fiscal year fail to meet minimum annual debt
service for the year, as defined in RCW 47.60.440, the ((commission)) governor
shall promptly revise the tolls and charges after considering supporting data
and recommendations therefor which shall be furnished by a nationally
recognized traffic engineering firm retained by the ((commission)) governor
in the manner provided in the bond proceedings.

Tolls and charges shall
not be increased in any case when in the opinion of the engineering firm the
increase would so reduce traffic that no net gain in revenue would result.
This section is a covenant for the benefit of the holders of the bonds.

Sec. 41. RCW 47.60.505 and 1986 c
66 s 9 are each amended to read as follows:

There is hereby created
in the motor vehicle fund the Puget Sound capital construction account. All
moneys hereafter deposited in said account shall be used by the Washington
state ferries department ((of transportation)) for:

(1) Reimbursing the
motor vehicle fund for all transfers therefrom made in accordance with RCW
47.60.620; and

(2) Improving the
Washington state ferry system including, but not limited to, vessel
acquisition, vessel construction, major and minor vessel improvements, terminal
construction and improvements, ((and reconstruction or replacement of, and
improvements to, the Hood Canal bridge, reimbursement of the motor vehicle fund
for any state funds, other than insurance proceeds, expended therefrom for
reconstruction or replacement of and improvements to the Hood Canal bridge,))
pursuant to proper appropriations((: PROVIDED, That)). Any
funds accruing to the Puget Sound capital construction account after June 30,
1979, which are not required to reimburse the motor vehicle fund pursuant to
RCW 47.60.620 as such obligations come due nor are required for capital
improvements of the Washington state ferries pursuant to appropriations
therefor shall from time to time as shall be determined by the Washington
state ferries department ((of transportation)) be transferred by the
state treasurer to the Puget Sound ferry operations account in the motor
vehicle fund.

(3) The department may
pledge any moneys in the Puget Sound capital construction account or to be
deposited in that account to guarantee the payment of principal or interest on
bonds issued to refund the outstanding 1955 Washington state ferry system
refunding bonds ((and the 1957 ferry and Hood Canal bridge revenue bonds)).

The department may
further pledge moneys in the Puget Sound capital construction account to meet any
sinking fund requirements or reserves established by the department with
respect to any bond issues provided for in this section.

To the extent of any
pledge authorized in this section, the department shall use the first moneys
available in the Puget Sound capital construction account to meet such
obligations as they arise, and shall maintain a balance of not less than one
million dollars in the account for this purpose.

(4) The treasurer shall
never transfer any moneys from the Puget Sound capital construction account for
use by the department for state highway purposes so long as there is due and
unpaid any obligations for payment of principal, interest, sinking funds, or
reserves as required by any pledge of the Puget Sound capital construction account.
Whenever the department has pledged any moneys in the account for the purposes
authorized in this section, the state agrees to continue to deposit in the
Puget Sound capital construction account the motor vehicle fuel taxes and
special fuel taxes as provided in RCW 82.36.020 and 82.38.290 and further
agrees that, so long as there exists any outstanding obligations pursuant to
such pledge, to continue to impose such taxes.

(5) Funds in the Puget
Sound capital construction account of the motor vehicle fund that are not
required by the department for payment of principal or interest on bond issues
or for any of the other purposes authorized in this chapter may be invested by
the department in bonds and obligations of the nature eligible for the investment
of current state funds as provided in RCW 43.84.080.

Sec. 42. RCW 47.60.530 and 1979 c
27 s 4 are each amended to read as follows:

There is
hereby created in the motor vehicle fund the Puget Sound ferry operations
account to the credit of which shall be deposited all moneys directed by law to
be deposited therein. All moneys deposited in this account shall be expended
pursuant to appropriations only for ((reimbursement of the motor vehicle
fund for any state moneys, other than insurance proceeds, expended therefrom
for alternate transportation services instituted as a result of the destruction
of the Hood Canal bridge, and for)) maintenance and operation of the
Washington state ferries ((including the Hood Canal bridge)),
supplementing as required the revenues available from the Washington state
ferry system.

Sec. 43. RCW 47.60.760 and 1983 c
133 s 9 are each amended to read as follows:

The Washington state
ferries department ((of transportation shall)) may not be
required to make available for public inspection and copying financial
information supplied by any person, firm, or corporation for the purpose of
qualifying to submit a bid or proposal for a ferry system construction or
repair contract as required by RCW 47.60.680 through 47.60.750.

Sec. 44. RCW 47.64.120 and 1997 c
436 s 1 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) Ferry system
management and ferry system employee organizations, through their collective
bargaining representatives, shall meet at reasonable times, to negotiate in
good faith with respect to wages, hours, working conditions, insurance, and
health care benefits as limited by RCW 47.64.270, and other matters mutually
agreed upon. Employer funded retirement benefits shall be provided under the
public employees retirement system under chapter 41.40 RCW and shall not be
included in the scope of collective bargaining. If the legislature enacts
an across-the-board salary increase granted automatically to all state
employees including ferry system employees, ferry system employees may not
bargain for salary increases in addition to the amount granted by the
legislature.

(2) Upon ratification
of bargaining agreements, ferry employees are entitled to an amount equivalent
to the interest earned on retroactive compensation increases. For purposes of
this section, the interest earned on retroactive compensation increases is the
same monthly rate of interest that was earned on the amount of the compensation
increases while held in the state treasury. The interest will be computed for
each employee until the date the retroactive compensation is paid, and must be
allocated in accordance with appropriation authority. The interest earned on
retroactive compensation is not considered part of the ongoing compensation
obligation of the state and is not compensation earnable for the purposes of
chapter 41.40 RCW. Negotiations shall also include grievance procedures for
resolving any questions arising under the agreement, which shall be embodied in
a written agreement and signed by the parties.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
45. The following acts or
parts of acts are each repealed:

(1) RCW 47.60.330 (Public participation) and
1983 c 15 s 26; and

(2) RCW 47.64.290 (Toll bridge employees
subject to civil service) and 1984 c 48 s 2.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 46. Sections 1 through 10 and
13 through 18 of this act constitute a new chapter in Title 47 RCW.

---
END ---