BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF
WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1. RCW 88.02.020 and 1985 c
267 s 1 are each amended to read as follows:

Except as provided in
this chapter, no person may own or operate any vessel on the waters of this
state unless the vessel has been registered and displays a registration number
and a valid decal in accordance with this chapter, except that a vessel which
has or is required to have a valid marine document as a vessel of the United
States is only required to display a valid decal.

As of July 1, 2001,
an owner registering a vessel under this section or RCW 88.02.070, must present
to the department within twelve months of registering the vessel, written
certification reflecting successful completion of a boating safety education
course that meets the standards established by the National Association of State
Boating Law Administrators. Upon presentation of the certification, the
department shall note the receipt of this credential on file. Failure to
provide written certification to the department within the twelve-month period
will result in the invalidation of the vessel's title and registration.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 2. This act is necessary for
the immediate preservation of the public peace, health, or safety, or support
of the state government and its existing public institutions, and takes effect
July 1, 2001.

---
END ---