BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF
WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec.
1. The legislature finds
that local governments need financial assistance in constructing new jails or
making improvements to existing jails. The public health and safety depends on
having space in jails for persons who constitute a danger to society, who have
violated parole, or who otherwise legally should be in jail but are not because
of a lack of space. The legislature periodically has provided assistance to
local governments in the past to build or renovate jails. Examples of this
assistance include a 1983 program funded by one hundred forty-four million
dollars in general obligation bonds, and three million dollars for the Yakima
jail in 1991. The legislature intends to help local governments address a
backlog in jail construction and renovation projects.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
2. A new section is added
to chapter 70.48 RCW to read as follows:

(1) For the purposes of
providing funds for the planning, acquisition, construction, and improvement of
jails and necessary supporting facilities within the state, the state finance
committee is authorized to issue general obligation bonds of the state of
Washington in the sum of one hundred million dollars, or as much thereof as may
be required, to finance these projects and all costs incidental thereto, except
for acquisition and preparation of sites. No bonds authorized in this section
may be offered for sale without prior legislative appropriation of the net
proceeds of the sale of the bonds.

(2) The proceeds from
the sale of bonds authorized in subsection (1) of this section must be
deposited in the state building construction account created in RCW 43.83.020.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
3. A new section is added
to chapter 70.48 RCW to read as follows:

(1) The department of
community, trade, and economic development must make recommendations to the
legislature regarding the use of funds provided under section 2 of this act for
the purpose of grants to local governments for the planning, acquisition,
construction, and improvement of jails and necessary supporting facilities
within the state, except for acquisition and preparation of the sites. In
making recommendations under this section, the department of community, trade,
and economic development must develop a priority process for jail projects.
The priority list shall consider, among other things, the following:

(a) Geographic balance;

(b) The cost of the
project in comparison to the local government's financial resources;

(c) The importance of
the project to the public health and safety of the community; and

(d) Other criteria that
the department of community, trade, and economic development considers
advisable.

(2) The department of
community, trade, and economic development must, by December 1st of each year,
submit its prioritized list of jail projects to the appropriate fiscal
committees of the senate and house of representatives. Projects are considered
approved only if the legislature appropriates funds for those specific
projects.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
4. The sum of twenty-four
million dollars, or as much thereof as may be necessary, is appropriated for
the biennium ending June 30, 2003, from the state building construction account
from the sale of bonds authorized in section 2 of this act to the department of
community, trade, and economic development for a grant to Benton county for a
jail facility. Before receiving the grant, the county must demonstrate to the
satisfaction of the department of community, trade, and economic development
the ability to complete the construction of the facility and fund its
operation.

Sec. 5. RCW 43.155.020 and 1996
c 168 s 2 are each amended to read as follows:

((Unless the context
clearly requires otherwise,)) The definitions in this section ((shall))
apply throughout this chapter unless the context clearly requires otherwise.

(1) "Board"
means the public works board created in RCW 43.155.030.

(2)
"Department" means the department of community, trade, and economic
development.

(3) "Financing
guarantees" means the pledge of money in the public works assistance
account, or money to be received by the public works assistance account, to the
repayment of all or a portion of the principal of or interest on obligations
issued by local governments to finance public works projects.

(4) "Local
governments" means cities, towns, counties, special purpose districts, and
any other municipal corporations or quasi-municipal corporations in the state
excluding school districts and port districts.

(5) "Public works
project" means a project of a local government for the planning,
acquisition, construction, repair, reconstruction, replacement, rehabilitation,
or improvement of streets and roads, bridges, water systems, jails and
supporting facilities, or storm and sanitary sewage systems and solid waste
facilities, including recycling facilities.

(6) "Solid waste
or recycling project" means remedial actions necessary to bring abandoned
or closed landfills into compliance with regulatory requirements and the
repair, restoration, and replacement of existing solid waste transfer,
recycling facilities, and landfill projects limited to the opening of landfill
cells that are in existing and permitted landfills.

(7) "Technical
assistance" means training and other services provided to local
governments to: (a) Help such local governments plan, apply, and qualify for
loans and financing guarantees from the board, and (b) help local governments
improve their ability to plan for, finance, acquire, construct, repair,
replace, rehabilitate, and maintain public facilities.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 6. This act is necessary for
the immediate preservation of the public peace, health, or safety, or support
of the state government and its existing public institutions, and takes effect
immediately.

---
END ---