BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF
WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1. RCW 47.17.740 and 1970
ex.s. c 51 s 149 are each amended to read as follows:

A state highway to be
known as state route number 526 is established as follows:

Beginning at a junction
with state route number 525 at Mukilteo, thence easterly to a junction with
state route number 5 in the vicinity of its junction with state route number
527; also

From
the junction with state route number 526 at Mukilteo, thence southerly to a
junction with state route number 525.

--- END ---