BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF
WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec.
1. A new section is added
to chapter 42.52 RCW to read as follows:

(1) This chapter does
not apply to charitable fund-raising by a state officer or state employee
except that:

(a) State officers and
state employees under the jurisdiction of the legislative ethics board may not
engage in charitable fund-raising during the time periods specified in RCW
42.17.710; and

(b) A state officer or
state employee may not use or authorize the use of the facilities of an agency
for purposes of charitable fund-raising.

(2) Subsection (1) of
this section does not limit charitable fund-raising if the activity involves:

(a) Incidental
nonspecific solicitations for donations, as defined by the appropriate ethics
boards by rule;

(b) An endorsement
without a direct solicitation for donations;

(c) The normal and
regular conduct of the office or agency, or activities that are a part of the
state officer's or state employee's official duties; or

(d) The de minimus use
of the state officer's or state employee's time, or other de minimus use of an
agency's facilities as the appropriate ethics boards may adopt by rule.

(3) As used in this
section:

(a) "Charitable
fund-raising" includes, but is not limited to, directly or indirectly
soliciting or receiving donations, or suggesting potential donors, on behalf or
for the benefit of a civic, charitable, governmental, or community organization
or institution.

(b)
"Facilities of an agency" means the facilities specified in RCW
42.52.180.

--- END ---