BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF
WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec.
1. (1) The department of
ecology shall conduct an analysis of the availability of a site or sites for
the construction of a water storage facility in the Wenatchee river basin and
the facility's potential to provide for improved instream flows and future water
supply.

(2) The analysis shall
include, but is not limited to, an analysis of the geology and hydrology of
potential sites and appropriate dam design and dynamics, and its impact on
water-related issues. The department shall conduct its analysis through
contracts with Chelan county in consultation with the initiating governments of
the watershed planning unit for water resource inventory area 45. The
department shall consult with other interested parties including Indian tribes
and agencies of the federal government regarding the scope of issues to be
addressed in the analysis.

(3) The analysis in
this section shall be completed by June 30, 2003.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 2. The sum of two hundred
fifty thousand dollars, or as much thereof as may be necessary, is appropriated
for the fiscal year ending June 30, 2002, from the general fund to the
department of ecology for the purposes of section 1 of this act.

---
END ---