BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF
WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec.
1. A new section is added
to chapter 28B.30 RCW to read as follows:

(1) The legislature
finds that the real property transferred to Washington State University in 1981
under RCW 72.01.142 for use as a dairy/forage research facility is no longer
best suited for that purpose and it is in the public interest to transfer that
land to the city of Buckley.

(2) The board of
regents of Washington State University shall transfer ownership, management,
and control of the real property the university received under RCW 72.01.142 to
the city of Buckley by July 1, 2001. The livestock, supplies, vehicles, and
other tangible property related to the dairy/forage facility operated by the
university may be moved to other university property or otherwise disposed of
by the university. The documents and records of the dairy/forage facility must
be kept by Washington State University.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
2. RCW 72.01.142 (Transfer of dairy
operation from Rainier school) and 1981 c 238 s 2 are each repealed.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 3. This act is necessary for
the immediate preservation of the public peace, health, or safety, or support
of the state government and its existing public institutions, and takes effect
immediately.

---
END ---