BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF
WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec.
1. A new section is added
to chapter 70.84 RCW to read as follows:

(1) Any person who,
with no legal justification, intentionally or negligently interferes or allows
his or her pet to interfere with the use of a dog guide or service animal by
obstructing, harassing, threatening, intimidating, distracting, or otherwise
jeopardizing the safety of the dog guide or service animal user, or his or her
dog guide or service animal, is guilty of a gross misdemeanor punishable
according to chapter 9A.20 RCW.

(2) Any person who
negligently injures or causes the death of a dog guide or service animal, or
negligently allows his or her pet to injure or cause the death of a dog guide
or service animal, is guilty of a gross misdemeanor punishable according to
chapter 9A.20 RCW.

(3) Any person, who
with no legal justification, intentionally injures or causes the death of a dog
guide or service animal, is guilty of a class B felony, punishable according to
chapter 9A.20 RCW.

(4) Any person who
wrongfully obtains or exerts unauthorized control over the dog guide or service
animal with intent to deprive the dog guide or service animal user of the dog
guide or service animal is guilty of a class B felony punishable according to chapter
9A.20 RCW.

(5) In any case in
which the defendant is convicted of a violation of this section, the defendant
shall be ordered to make restitution for veterinary expenses and replacement
costs, including retraining, of the dog guide or service animal to the party or
parties who are responsible for such costs, and restitution for any income lost
by the dog guide or service animal user if the dog guide or service animal is
no longer able to safely or dependably perform its duties.

(6) Nothing in this section
is intended to affect any civil remedies available for violations of this
section.

Sec. 2. RCW 70.84.070 and 1985 c
90 s 5 are each amended to read as follows:

Any person or persons,
firm or corporation, or the agent of any person or persons, firm or
corporation, who denies or interferes with admittance to or enjoyment of the
public facilities enumerated in RCW 70.84.010, or otherwise interferes with the
rights of a totally or partially blind, hearing impaired, or otherwise
physically disabled person as set forth in RCW 70.84.010 shall be guilty of a
misdemeanor except as otherwise provided in this chapter.

Sec. 3. RCW 9.08.070 and 1989 c
359 s 2 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) Any person who,
with intent to deprive or defraud the owner thereof, does any of the following
shall be guilty of a gross misdemeanor and shall be punished as prescribed
under RCW 9A.20.021(2) and by a mandatory fine of not less than five hundred
dollars per pet animal except as provided by (d) of this subsection:

(a) Takes, leads away,
confines, secretes or converts any pet animal, except in cases in which the
value of the pet animal exceeds two hundred fifty dollars;

(b) Conceals the
identity of any pet animal or its owner by obscuring, altering, or removing
from the pet animal any collar, tag, license, tattoo, or other identifying
device or mark.

(c) Willfully or
recklessly kills or injures any pet animal, unless excused by law.

(d) Nothing in this
subsection or subsection (2) of this section shall prohibit a person from also
being convicted of separate offenses under RCW 9A.56.030, 9A.56.040, or
9A.56.050 for theft ((or under)); RCW 9A.56.150, 9A.56.160, or
9A.56.170 for possession of stolen property; or section 1 of this act
relating to dog guides and service animals.

(2)(a) It is unlawful
for any person to receive with intent to sell to a research institution in the
state of Washington, or sell or otherwise directly transfer to a research
institution in the state of Washington, a pet animal that the person knows or
has reason to know has been stolen or fraudulently obtained. This subsection
does not apply to U.S.D.A. licensed dealers.

(b) The first
conviction under (a) of this subsection is a gross misdemeanor and is
punishable as prescribed under RCW 9A.20.021(2) and by a mandatory fine of not
less than five hundred dollars per pet animal. A second or subsequent
conviction under (a) of this subsection is a class C felony and is punishable
as prescribed under RCW 9A.20.021(1)(c) and by a mandatory fine of not less
than one thousand dollars per pet animal.

(3)(a) It is unlawful
for any person, who knows or has reason to know that a pet animal has been
stolen or fraudulently obtained, to sell or otherwise transfer the pet animal
to another who the person knows or has reason to know has previously sold a
stolen or fraudulently obtained pet animal to a research institution in the
state of Washington.

(b) A conviction under
(a) of this subsection is a class C felony and shall be punishable as
prescribed under RCW 9A.20.021(1)(c) and by a mandatory fine of not less than
one thousand dollars per pet animal.

(4)(a) It is unlawful
for a U.S.D.A. licensed dealer to receive with intent to sell, or sell or transfer
directly or through a third party, to a research institution in the state of
Washington, a pet animal that the dealer knows or has reason to know has been
stolen or fraudulently obtained.

(b) A conviction under
(a) of this subsection is a class C felony and shall be punishable as
prescribed under RCW 9A.20.021(1)(c) and by a mandatory fine of not less than
one thousand dollars per pet animal.

(5) The sale, receipt,
or transfer of each individual pet animal in violation of subsections (1), (2),
(3), and (4) of this section constitutes a separate offense.

(6) The
provisions of subsections (1), (2), (3), and (4) of this section shall not
apply to the lawful acts of any employee, agent, or director of any humane
society, animal control agency, or animal shelter operated by or on behalf of
any government agency, operating under law.

---
END ---