BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF
WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1. RCW 28A.600.420 and 1997
c 265 s 5 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) Any elementary or
secondary school student who is determined to have carried a firearm or an
explosive onto, or to have possessed a firearm or explosive on,
public elementary or secondary school premises, public school-provided
transportation, or areas of facilities while being used exclusively by public
schools, shall be expelled from school for not less than one year under RCW
28A.600.010. The superintendent of the school district, educational service
district, state school for the deaf, or state school for the blind may modify
the expulsion of a student on a case-by-case basis.

(2)(a) For
purposes of this section, "firearm" means a firearm as defined in 18
U.S.C. Sec. 921, and a "firearm" as defined in RCW 9.41.010.

(b) For purposes of
this section, "explosive" means an explosive as defined in RCW
70.74.010, except that "explosive" shall not include common fireworks
as defined in RCW 70.77.126.

(3) This section shall
be construed in a manner consistent with the individuals with disabilities
education act, 20 U.S.C. Sec. 1401 et seq.

(4) Nothing in this
section prevents a public school district, educational service district, the
state school for the deaf, or the state school for the blind if it has expelled
a student from such student's regular school setting from providing educational
services to the student in an alternative setting.

(5) This section does
not apply to:

(a) Any student while
engaged in military education authorized by school authorities in which rifles
are used but not other firearms or explosives; or

(b) Any student while
involved in a convention, showing, demonstration, lecture, or firearms or
explosives safety course authorized by school authorities in which the
rifles of collectors or instructors are handled or displayed but not other
firearms or explosives; or

(c) Any student while
participating in a rifle competition authorized by school authorities.

(6) A school district
may suspend or expel a student for up to one year subject to subsections (1),
(3), (4), and (5) of this section, if the student acts with malice as defined
under RCW 9A.04.110 and displays an instrument that ((appeared [appears]))
appears to be a firearm or an explosive or explosive device including
but not limited to a bomb, on public elementary or secondary school
premises, public school-provided transportation, or areas of facilities while being
used exclusively by public schools.

(7)
This section shall not be construed to require suspension or expulsion for the
possession of fireworks on school grounds. As used in this section,
"fireworks" means any fireworks defined in RCW 70.77.126 and determined
by the Washington state fire marshal to be legally possessed by the person in
possession of the fireworks.

--- END ---