BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF
WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1. RCW 35.20.255 and 1999 c
56 s 3 are each amended to read as follows:

Judges of the municipal
court, in their discretion, shall have the power in all criminal proceedings
within their jurisdiction including violations of city ordinances, to defer
imposition of any sentence, suspend all or part of any sentence, fix the terms
of any such deferral or suspension, and provide for such probation and parole
as in their opinion is reasonable and necessary under the circumstances of the
case, but in no case shall it extend for more than five years from the date of
conviction for a defendant to be sentenced under RCW 46.61.5055 and two years
from the date of conviction for all other offenses. If a court of limited
jurisdiction orders a defendant to appear before the court following conviction
and imposition of a deferred or suspended sentence and the defendant fails to
appear for the hearing as ordered and the defendant is otherwise amenable to
process then the court's jurisdiction shall be tolled. The period of the
court's jurisdiction shall be tolled during any period a warrant is
outstanding. However, the jurisdiction period in this section does not
apply to the enforcement of orders issued under RCW 46.20.720.

Sec. 2. RCW 3.50.330 and 1999 c
56 s 1 are each amended to read as follows:

For a period not to
exceed five years after imposition of sentence for a defendant sentenced under
RCW 46.61.5055 and two years after imposition of sentence for all other
offenses, the court shall have continuing jurisdiction and authority to suspend
the execution of all or any part of the sentence upon stated terms, including
installment payment of fines. If a court of limited jurisdiction orders a
defendant to appear before the court following conviction and imposition of a
deferred or suspended sentence and the defendant fails to appear for the
hearing as ordered and the defendant is otherwise amenable to process then the
court's jurisdiction shall be tolled. The period of the court's jurisdiction
shall be tolled during any period a warrant is outstanding. However, the
jurisdiction period in this section does not apply to the enforcement of orders
issued under RCW 46.20.720.

Sec. 3. RCW 3.66.068 and 1999 c
56 s 2 are each amended to read as follows:

For a
period not to exceed five years after imposition of sentence for a defendant
sentenced under RCW 46.61.5055 and two years after imposition of sentence for
all other offenses, the court has continuing jurisdiction and authority to
suspend the execution of all or any part of its sentence upon stated terms,
including installment payment of fines. If a court of limited jurisdiction
orders a defendant to appear before the court following conviction and
imposition of a deferred or suspended sentence and the defendant fails to
appear for the hearing as ordered and the defendant is otherwise amenable to
process then the court's jurisdiction shall be tolled. The period of the
court's jurisdiction shall be tolled during any period a warrant is
outstanding. However, the jurisdiction period in this section does not
apply to the enforcement of orders issued under RCW 46.20.720.

---
END ---