BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF
WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec.
1. The legislature
recognizes that while state law provides property tax relief for low-income
homeowners age sixty-one and older, it does not provide similar relief to
low-income tenants age sixty-one and over who indirectly pay property taxes
through their rent. Tenants also do not receive financial benefits in the form
of mortgage interest deductions for their federal income taxes as do
homeowners.

The legislature also
recognizes that a higher percentage of elderly renters than homeowners are low
income and are therefore more likely to need financial assistance from the
state, and that increasing rents have adversely impacted elderly renters with
low incomes in many parts of the state.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
2. A new section is added
to chapter 74.04 RCW to read as follows:

(1) There shall be paid
annually from the state's general fund or other sources as designated by the
legislature for this purpose, up to one hundred twenty dollars to each low-income
elderly tenant household that becomes an eligible household by meeting all the
following criteria:

(a) The household must
file a claim annually in a form and at a time prescribed by the department of
revenue.

(b) The household must
provide proof of qualification as the department of revenue may require.

(c) The household must
have resided in an apartment or other rental property for at least one hundred
eighty consecutive days during the applicable twelve-month period as prescribed
by the department of revenue in one or more residences.

(d) The household must
have paid rent for the one hundred eighty days of its tenancy or tenancies used
to satisfy the requirement of (c) of this subsection.

(e) The residence must
not have been exempt from any portion of property taxes on the residence(s) in
the applicable twelve-month period as prescribed by the department of revenue.

(f) At least one member
of the household who resided in the residence(s) during the one hundred eighty
consecutive days when all other conditions are met will be sixty-one years of
age or older at the end of the applicable twelve-month period as prescribed by
the department of revenue and would have qualified, based on combined
disposable income, for any exemption from property taxes under RCW 84.36.381 if
that person had owned the residence(s).

(g) At least one member
of the household who qualifies under (f) of this subsection was not, for any
portion of the same twelve-month period as prescribed by the department of
revenue, the sole member qualifying under (f) of this subsection for any other
household that receives payment under this section.

(2) The annual payment
to each eligible household will be pro-rated for each month for which rent was
paid to occupy an eligible residence at a rate of ten dollars for each complete
calendar month.

(3) As used in this
section, the term "residence" means a single-family dwelling unit
that contains complete facilities for living, sleeping, cooking, and
sanitation, whether the unit is separate or part of a multiunit dwelling that
is rented by an eligible household.

(4) The payments
required in this section shall be proportionately reduced if the moneys
appropriated by the legislature are insufficient to pay the full amount to all
qualified claimants.

(5) The
department of revenue shall adopt rules consistent with this section as
necessary or desirable to permit its effective administration.

---
END ---