BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF
WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1. RCW 46.12.020 and 1989 c
337 s 22 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) No vehicle
license number plates or certificate of license registration, whether original
issues or duplicates, may be issued or furnished by the department unless the
applicant, at the same time, makes satisfactory application for a certificate
of ownership or presents satisfactory evidence that such a certificate of
ownership covering the vehicle has been previously issued.

(2) Except as
otherwise provided in this section, no vehicle license number plates or
certificate of license registration, whether original issues or duplicates, and
no renewed vehicle license may be issued by the department unless the applicant
possesses a valid driver's license. In the case of joint application by more
than one person, each applicant must possess a valid driver's license.

(3) Subsection (2)
of this section applies only to applicants who are individual persons and does
not apply to corporations, other businesses, or vehicles proportionally
registered under chapter 46.87 RCW.

(4) Subsection (2)
of this section does not apply to an applicant with respect to whom the
department determines that:

(a) The applicant's
driver's license is not currently suspended or revoked and the applicant is not
in suspended or revoked status;

(b) The applicant
has not been convicted of a violation of RCW 46.20.021, 46.20.342, or
46.20.345; and

(c) Circumstances
not related to any violation of this title account for the applicant's current
lack of a driver's license and the applicant's need to register a vehicle. The
applicant shall by affidavit indicate:

(i) The reason for
the applicant's lack of a driver's license;

(ii) The need the
applicant has for registering a vehicle; and

(iii) That the
applicant will not knowingly permit a person without a driver's license to
drive a vehicle registered in the applicant's name.

(5) A knowingly made
material misstatement on an affidavit under subsection (4)(c) of this section
is a misdemeanor.

(6) No
denial under this section of issuance or of renewal of plates or certificates
affects the right of a person to maintain, transfer, or acquire title in a
vehicle. Unless the parties to the contract agree otherwise, no such denial
affects the rights or obligations of a party to a contract for the purchase, or
for the financing of the purchase, of a motor vehicle.

--- END ---