BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF
WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec.
1. A new section is added
to chapter 82.04 RCW to read as follows:

(1) This chapter does
not apply to amounts received by persons engaged in the motion picture or video
production business.

(2) "Motion
picture or video production business" means a person engaged in the
production of motion pictures and videotapes for exhibition, sale, or for
broadcast by a person other than the person producing the motion picture or
videotape.

(3) The exemption
provided for in this section does not apply to a motion picture or video
production business that is engaged, to any degree, in the production of erotic
material, as defined in RCW 9.68.050.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 2. This act takes effect
August 1, 2001.

---
END ---