BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF
WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec.
1. DECLARATION OF POLICY. It is the solemn
obligation of each generation to provide beneficial stewardship of Washington
state's natural resources. Meeting this obligation requires restoration of the
environment, and improved protection of the health and safety of our citizens. The
purpose of this chapter is to provide funding for (1) facilities that control,
collect, treat, reuse, or dispose of wastewater and storm water; (2) facilities
that treat, conserve, or distribute drinking water; (3) improvements to or
replacement of existing irrigation facilities that will conserve water or
improve water quality; (4) acquiring valuable or potentially valuable riparian
habitat; and (5) acquiring valid, current water rights in order to restore
streamflows. Only those facilities and acquisitions that are in compliance
with applicable land use and growth management act comprehensive plans, urban
growth areas, critical area ordinances, development regulations, and other
applicable requirements are eligible for funding under this chapter.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
2. DEFINITIONS. Unless the
context requires otherwise, the definitions in this section apply throughout
this chapter.

(1) "Administering
agencies" means the agencies identified by the legislature as responsible
for administering the funds made available under this chapter.

(2) "Current,
valid water right" means a water right, whether a permit, certificate, or
claim, under which water is currently being used, or has been used in the
preceding five years, in a manner consistent with the terms of the water right,
and which has not been relinquished or abandoned.

(3) "Drinking
water treatment, conservation, and distribution facilities" means domestic
or municipal water supply, treatment, conservation, or distribution systems
including but not limited to equipment, utilities, structures, real property,
and interests in and improvements on real property necessary for or incidental
to the acquisition, construction, installation, or use of any such water supply
treatment, conservation, or distribution system.

(4) "Public
body" means the state of Washington or any agency, political subdivision,
special purpose district, or municipal or quasi-municipal corporation thereof;
an agency of the federal government; and those Indian tribes now or hereafter
recognized as such by the federal government.

(5) "Small
communities" means an incorporated town or city or unincorporated area
with a population of five thousand or fewer or a special purpose district or
other municipal or quasi-municipal corporation providing services to five
thousand customers or fewer on the effective date of this act.

(6) "Wastewater
and storm water collection, treatment, and reuse facilities" means any
facilities or systems used for the control, collection, storage, treatment,
reuse, recycling, or disposal of wastewater, including but not limited to
sanitary sewage, residential, industrial, commercial, and agricultural
wastewater; or municipal storm water. Such facilities may include all
equipment, utilities, structures, real property, and interests in and
improvements on real property necessary for or incidental to such purpose.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
3. GENERAL OBLIGATION BONDS‑-AUTHORIZED‑-ISSUANCE,
SALE, TERMS‑-APPROPRIATION REQUIRED. For the purpose of providing funds
to public bodies for:

(1) The planning,
acquisition, construction, and improvement of wastewater and/or storm water
control, collection, treatment, disposal, or reuse facilities;

(2) The planning,
acquisition, construction, and improvement of drinking water treatment,
conservation, and distribution facilities;

(3) The planning,
acquisition, construction, improvement, or replacement of existing irrigation
facilities that will conserve water or improve water quality;

(4) Identifying,
acquiring, improving, and maintaining riparian areas that currently have or
will have value as fish and/or wildlife habitat; and

(5) Identifying,
acquiring, leasing, and maintaining valid, current water rights and converting
such water rights into instream flow rights,

the state finance committee
shall issue general obligation bonds of the state of Washington in the sum of
one billion dollars to finance the facilities, acquisitions, and other
expenditures authorized by this chapter and all costs incidental thereto.
These bonds are special indebtedness under Article VIII, section 3 of the state
Constitution and shall be paid and discharged within twenty-five years after
the date of issuance. No bonds authorized by this chapter may be offered for
sale without prior legislative appropriation of the net proceeds of the bonds
to be sold.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
4. DEPOSIT OF PROCEEDS INTO
CLEAN WATER INVESTMENT ACCOUNT, 2001‑-APPROPRIATION. The proceeds from
the sale of bonds authorized by this chapter shall be deposited into the clean
water investment account, 2001, which is hereby created in the state treasury.
These funds shall be appropriated by the legislature as follows:

(1) Thirty percent of
the funding shall be used for the purposes specified in section 3(1) of this
act;

(2) Thirty percent of
the funding shall be used for the purposes specified in section 3(2) of this
act;

(3) Fifteen percent of
the funding shall be used for the purposes specified in section 3(3) of this
act;

(4) Ten percent of the
funding shall be used for the purposes specified in section 3(4) of this act;
and

(5) Fifteen percent of
the funding shall be used for the purposes specified in section 3(5) of this
act.

Five years after the
effective date of this act, the legislature may review the distribution of
funds set forth under subsections (1) through (5) of this section, and may
reallocate the percentage distribution within the five eligible categories of
expenditures based on demonstrated need and environmental benefit.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
5. ADMINISTRATION OF
PROCEEDS. (1) General. The proceeds from the sale of the bonds deposited in
the clean water investment account, 2001 shall be administered by the
administering agencies, which shall be designated by the legislature when it
initially appropriates funds made available under this chapter. The
administering agencies may use or permit the use of any funds so deposited to
accomplish the authorized purposes by direct expenditures and by grants to
public bodies. Funds made available under this chapter may be used as matching
funds when federal, local, or other funds are made available on a matching
basis for facilities, acquisitions, or other expenditures eligible for funding
under this chapter.

(2) Promulgation of
Rules‑-Funding Criteria‑-Small Communities. (a) The administering
agencies shall, within six months of the initial appropriation of funds made
available under this chapter, adopt rules governing the expenditure of funds
made available under this chapter.

(b) These rules shall
include grant eligibility criteria, which shall include, but not be limited to,
the following: (i) Environmental performance as described in subsection (5) of
this section; (ii) the project sponsor's ability to provide its own funding for
the project; and (iii) the availability of funding from other sources.

(c) Fifty percent of
the funding provided for the purposes specified in section 3 (1) and (2) of
this act shall be awarded to small communities or to public bodies providing
services to small communities. Up to ninety percent of the eligible costs of
any project undertaken by a small community shall be grant eligible.

(3) Costs of
Administration. Not more than four percent of the proceeds of the bond issue
may be used to pay the cost of administration of the grants, acquisitions, and
other expenditures authorized by this chapter, including the administering
agency's costs incurred providing technical, financial, and engineering
assistance.

(4) Biennial
Performance Accounting. Every two years the administering agencies shall
provide performance accounting reports to the governor and the legislature
detailing how the funding provided by this chapter has been expended over the
previous two years. Using appropriate performance measures and, if available, environmental
monitoring information, the reports shall describe the human health protection,
environmental improvement, and other value accruing to the public from the
expenditure of funds made available under this chapter.

(5) Environmental
Performance. The administering agencies shall prioritize for funding those
facilities or expenditures that provide the greatest benefit to human health or
the environment. Facilities that eliminate discharges of pollutants or that
employ water reuse or conservation measures shall be a high priority. Land or
water purchases that restore or protect threatened or endangered species shall
also be a high priority.

(6) Riparian Habitat
Purchases. At least seventy-five percent of the riparian habitat acquisitions
authorized by section 3(4) of this act shall be land that is currently or was
within the preceding five years used for agricultural purposes. These
acquisitions shall be on a willing-seller basis and the interest conveyed may
be a "fee" interest in the property or a permanent conservation
easement that protects the land's value as habitat.

(7) Water Right
Purchases. Only valid, current water rights may be leased or purchased with
funds made available by this chapter. The administering agency shall lease or
purchase water rights and convert such rights to trust water rights, as
specified in chapter 90.42 RCW, for instream flow protection or restoration
where such actions will benefit threatened or endangered species, improve water
quality, or restore or maintain other instream values identified in RCW
90.54.020(3). These leases or purchases shall be made on a willing-seller
basis only.

(8) Irrigation System
Improvements. The evaluation criteria for irrigation system projects shall
include improvements in system efficiency, water quality improvements, stream
flow restoration, and protection of fish and wildlife. Water conserved as a
result of irrigation system improvements paid for in part by funds made
available under this chapter shall be returned to the surface or ground water
from which it was originally withdrawn or diverted in a volume equal to the
percentage of system improvements paid for with funds made available under this
chapter.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
6. FORM, TERMS, CONDITIONS,
ETC., OF BONDS. The state finance committee is authorized to prescribe the
form, terms, conditions, and covenants of the bonds; the time or times of sale
of all or any portion of the bonds; and the conditions and manner of their sale
and issuance.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
7. ANTICIPATION NOTES‑-PAYMENT‑-PLEDGE
AND PROMISE‑-SEAL. When the state finance committee has determined to
issue the bonds or a portion thereof, it may, pending the issuance of the
bonds, issue, in the name of the state, short-term obligations in anticipation
of the money to be derived from the sale of the bonds. The portion of the
proceeds of the sale of the bonds as may be required for this purpose shall be
applied to the payment of the principal of and interest on the anticipation
notes which have been issued. The bonds and notes shall pledge the full faith,
credit, and taxing power of the state of Washington and shall contain an
unconditional promise to pay the principal and interest when due.

Sec. 8. RCW 82.08.020 and 2000
2nd sp.s. c 4 s 1 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) There is levied and
there shall be collected a tax on each retail sale in this state equal to six
and five-tenths percent of the selling price.

(2) There is levied and
there shall be collected an additional tax on each retail car rental,
regardless of whether the vehicle is licensed in this state, equal to five and
nine-tenths percent of the selling price. The revenue collected under this
subsection shall be deposited in the multimodal transportation account created
in RCW 47.66.070.

(3) There is levied
and there shall be collected an additional tax on each retail sale in this
state equal to one-tenth of one percent of the selling price. The revenue
collected under this subsection shall be deposited into the clean water
investment bond redemption fund under section 9 of this act.

(4) The taxes
imposed under this chapter shall apply to successive retail sales of the same
property.

(((4))) (5)
The rates provided in this section apply to taxes imposed under chapter 82.12
RCW as provided in RCW 82.12.020.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
9. RETIREMENT OF BONDS‑-REDEMPTION
FUND‑-REMEDIES OF BONDHOLDERS‑-DEBT-LIMIT GENERAL FUND BOND RETIREMENT
ACCOUNT. (1) The clean water investment bond redemption fund is created in the
state treasury. This fund is exclusively devoted to the payment of interest on
and retirement of the bonds authorized by this chapter. The state finance
committee shall, on or before June 30th of each year, certify to the state
treasurer the amount needed in the ensuing twelve months to meet the bond
retirement and interest requirements. On or before the date on which any
interest or principal and interest payment is due, the state treasurer shall
withdraw from any general state revenues received in the state treasury and
deposit in the clean water investment bond redemption fund an amount equal to
the amount certified by the state finance committee to be due on the payment
date. The owner and holder of each of the bonds or the trustee for the owner
and holder of any of the bonds may by mandamus or other appropriate proceeding
require the transfer and payment of funds as directed in this section. If a
debt-limit general fund bond retirement account is created in the state
treasury by chapter 456, Laws of 1997 and becomes effective prior to the
issuance of any of the bonds authorized by this chapter, the debt-limit general
fund bond retirement account shall be used for the purposes of this chapter in
lieu of the clean water investment bond redemption fund.

(2) To the extent
revenues in any given year exceed the amount necessary for debt service, the
state finance committee shall use such revenues for early purchase, redemption,
and retirement of outstanding bonds issued under this act.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
10. LEGISLATURE MAY PROVIDE
ADDITIONAL MEANS FOR PAYMENT OF BONDS. The legislature may provide additional
means for raising money for the payment of the principal and interest of the
bonds authorized in this chapter. This chapter does not provide an exclusive
method for the payment.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
11. BONDS LEGAL INVESTMENT
FOR PUBLIC FUNDS. The bonds authorized in this act are a legal investment for
all state funds or for funds under state control and for all funds of any other
public body.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
12. SEVERABILITY. If any
provision of this act or its application to any person or circumstance is held
invalid, the remainder of the act or the application of the provision to other
persons or circumstances is not affected.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
13. CAPTIONS NOT LAW.
Captions used in this chapter are not any part of the law.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 14. Sections 1 through 7 and
9 through 13 of this act constitute a new chapter in Title 90 RCW.

---
END ---