BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF
WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec.
1. The legislature finds
that the use of outcome and performance measures is necessary for demonstrating
the accountability of state government to the public. The legislature also
finds that performance measurement is integral to the efficient and effective
management and operation of state agencies and programs. Thus, the legislature
intends to increase the review of these measures to provide greater
accountability to the public and to ensure that state government has effective
systems for assessing performance.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
2. (1) The joint legislative
audit and review committee, with the cooperation of the office of the state
auditor, shall conduct reviews of the performance and outcome measures of those
state agencies and programs identified in this section. In conducting the
reviews, the joint legislative audit and review committee and the office of the
state auditor shall work in cooperation with the office of financial management
and state agency personnel. During the 2001-03 biennium, the following reviews
shall be undertaken and completed:

(a) The joint
legislative audit and review committee shall conduct reviews of the division of
alcohol and substance abuse and the children's administration in the department
of social and health services, as well as the department of ecology.

(b) The office of the
state auditor shall conduct reviews of the department of licensing, the
department of general administration, and the department of revenue.

(2) Both the joint
legislative audit and review committee and the office of the state auditor
shall develop a schedule and common methodology for conducting these reviews.
The reviews shall include, but not be limited to, the following:

(a) Determine whether
the performance and outcome measures are consistent with legislative mandates,
strategic plans, mission statements, and goals and objectives;

(b) Examine how agency
management uses the measures to manage resources in an efficient and effective manner;

(c) Assess how
performance benchmarks are established for the purpose of assessing overall
performance compared to external standards and benchmarks;

(d) Examine how an
analysis of the measurement data is used to make planning and operational improvements;

(e) Determine how
performance and outcome measures are used in the budget planning, development,
and allotment processes;

(f) Review how
performance data are reported to and used by the legislature;

(g) Assess whether the
performance measure data are reliable and collected in a uniform and timely
manner; and

(h) Make
recommendations as necessary.

(3) Completed
performance measure reviews shall be presented to the joint legislative audit
and review committee and published in the same manner as prescribed for
performance audits in RCW 44.28.088. Final reports shall also be transmitted
to the appropriate policy and fiscal committees of the legislature.

Sec. 3. RCW 44.28.071 and 1996 c
288 s 9 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) In conducting
performance audits and other reviews, the legislative auditor shall work
closely with the chairs and staff of standing committees of the senate and
house of representatives, and may work in consultation with the state auditor
and the director of financial management.

(2) The legislative
auditor may contract with and consult with public and private independent
professional and technical experts as necessary in conducting the performance
audits. The legislative auditor should also involve front-line employees and
internal auditors in the performance audit process to the highest possible
degree.

(3) The legislative
auditor shall work with the legislative evaluation and accountability program
committee and the office of financial management to develop information system
capabilities necessary for the performance audit requirements of this chapter.

(4) The legislative
auditor shall work with the ((legislative office of performance review and
the)) office of financial management and the office of the state auditor
to facilitate the implementation of effective performance measures throughout
state government. In agencies and programs where effective systems for
performance measurement exist, the measurements incorporated into those systems
should be a basis for performance audits conducted under this chapter.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 4. This act is necessary for
the immediate preservation of the public peace, health, or safety, or support
of the state government and its existing public institutions, and takes effect
immediately.

---
END ---