BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF
WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec.
1. The legislature finds
there has been an increase in criminal abuse, assault, neglect, and sexual
offenses against vulnerable persons. The legislature further finds that
criminal and juvenile offense adjudication proceedings involving vulnerable
persons may be hindered or precluded due to the incompetence or unavailability
of a vulnerable person at the time of trial despite an otherwise reliable
statement made by the vulnerable person concerning any abuse, assault, neglect,
or sexual offenses against the vulnerable person. The state has a compelling
interest in providing vulnerable persons who are victims of such crimes the
ability to ensure reliable evidence is made available in court on their
behalf. The legislature intends that this act make admissible as evidence the
reliable hearsay of vulnerable persons, while ensuring the constitutional
rights of other parties.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
2. A new section is added
to chapter 5.60 RCW to read as follows:

(1) An out-of-court
statement, not otherwise admissible by statute or court rule, made by a
vulnerable person describing an act constituting abuse, assault, neglect, or a
sexual offense against the declarant, when the act results in the death of or
substantial bodily harm to the declarant, is admissible as evidence in a
criminal or juvenile offense adjudication proceeding if the court finds:

(a) That the declarant
was not incompetent under RCW 5.60.050 at the time the out-of-court statement
was made;

(b) That the declarant
is unavailable as a witness at trial;

(c) That there is
corroborative evidence of the act against the declarant; and

(d) In a hearing
conducted outside the presence of the jury, if any, that the time, content, and
circumstances of the out-of-court statement provide sufficient indicia of
reliability.

(2) In making its
finding under subsection (1) of this section, the court shall consider whether,
at the time the statement was made, the reliability of the declaration was
indicated by:

(a) The general
character and trustworthiness of the declarant;

(b) The timing of the
declaration;

(c) The declarant's
lack of motive to lie;

(d) The relationship of
the declarant to the witness;

(e) Whether the
declarant made the statement to more than one person;

(f) The mental and
physical condition and cognitive ability of the declarant;

(g) Whether the
statement was made spontaneously;

(h) Whether the
statement expressed assertions of past fact;

(i) Whether
cross-examination would not have helped to show the declarant's lack of
knowledge;

(j) Whether the
possibility of the declarant's recollection being faulty was remote;

(k) Whether the
circumstances surrounding the statements gave no reason to suppose that the
declarant misrepresented the defendant's involvement;

(l) The relationship of
the declarant to the actor;

(m) The nature and
duration of the abuse, assault, neglect, or sexual contact; and

(n) Any other factor
deemed appropriate.

(3) A statement may not
be admitted under this section unless the proponent of the statement gives
notice to the adverse party of his or her intention to offer the statement and
the particulars of the statement sufficiently in advance of the proceedings to
provide the adverse party with a fair opportunity to challenge the
admissibility of the statement at a hearing.

(4) The court shall
state the basis for its ruling on the admissibility of any out-of-court
statement by making specific findings of fact on the record.

(5) For purposes of
this section:

(a) "Abuse"
means the intentional, reckless, or negligent causing of physical injury to a
vulnerable person by any wrongful, improper, or offensive act, manner, or
method of handling or dealing with the vulnerable person which is determined to
be unreasonable.

(b) "Assault"
means the commission of any unlawful assault causing physical injury to the
vulnerable person.

(c) "Neglect"
means the failure by one having a duty of care to a vulnerable person to provide
the goods or services necessary to maintain the physical well-being of the
vulnerable person proximately causing physical injury to the vulnerable person.

(d) "Sexual
offense" means the commission of any unlawful sexual offense causing
physical injury to the vulnerable person.

(e) "Substantial
bodily harm" has the same meaning as in RCW 9A.04.110.

(f)
"Unavailable" means the vulnerable person is unavailable under the
Washington state court rules of evidence.

(g) "Vulnerable
person" means any person who has the functional, mental, or physical
inability to care for himself or herself and:

(i) Is found
incapacitated under chapter 11.88 RCW; or

(ii) Has a
developmental disability as defined under RCW 71A.10.020; or

(iii) Has been admitted
to any facility as that term is defined in RCW 74.34.020; or

(iv) Is receiving
services from home health, hospice, or home care agencies licensed or required
to be licensed under chapter 70.127 RCW; or

(v) Is
receiving services from an individual provider as that term is defined in RCW
74.34.020.

---
END ---