BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF
WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1. RCW 10.93.020 and 1994 c
264 s 3 are each amended to read as follows:

As used in this
chapter, the following terms have the meanings indicated unless the context
clearly requires otherwise.

(1) "General
authority Washington law enforcement agency" means any agency, department,
or division of a municipal corporation, political subdivision, or other unit of
local government of this state, and any agency, department, or division of
state government, having as its primary function the detection and apprehension
of persons committing infractions or violating the traffic or criminal laws in
general, as distinguished from a limited authority Washington law enforcement
agency, and any other unit of government expressly designated by statute as a
general authority Washington law enforcement agency. The Washington state
patrol ((is a)) and the department of fish and wildlife are
general authority Washington law enforcement ((agency)) agencies.

(2) "Limited
authority Washington law enforcement agency" means any agency, political
subdivision, or unit of local government of this state, and any agency,
department, or division of state government, having as one of its functions the
apprehension or detection of persons committing infractions or violating the
traffic or criminal laws relating to limited subject areas, including but not
limited to, the state departments of natural resources((, fish and wildlife,))
and social and health services, the state gambling commission, the state
lottery commission, the state parks and recreation commission, the state
utilities and transportation commission, the state liquor control board, and
the state department of corrections.

(3) "General
authority Washington peace officer" means any full-time, fully compensated
and elected, appointed, or employed officer of a general authority Washington
law enforcement agency who is commissioned to enforce the criminal laws of the
state of Washington generally.

(4) "Limited
authority Washington peace officer" means any full-time, fully compensated
officer of a limited authority Washington law enforcement agency empowered by
that agency to detect or apprehend violators of the laws in some or all of the
limited subject areas for which that agency is responsible. A limited
authority Washington peace officer may be a specially commissioned Washington
peace officer if otherwise qualified for such status under this chapter.

(5) "Specially
commissioned Washington peace officer", for the purposes of this chapter,
means any officer, whether part-time or full-time, compensated or not,
commissioned by a general authority Washington law enforcement agency to
enforce some or all of the criminal laws of the state of Washington, who does
not qualify under this chapter as a general authority Washington peace officer
for that commissioning agency, specifically including reserve peace officers,
and specially commissioned full-time, fully compensated peace officers duly
commissioned by the states of Oregon or Idaho or any such peace officer
commissioned by a unit of local government of Oregon or Idaho. A reserve peace
officer is an individual who is an officer of a Washington law enforcement
agency who does not serve such agency on a full-time basis but who, when called
by the agency into active service, is fully commissioned on the same basis as
full-time peace officers to enforce the criminal laws of the state.

(6) "Federal peace
officer" means any employee or agent of the United States government who
has the authority to carry firearms and make warrantless arrests and whose
duties involve the enforcement of criminal laws of the United States.

(7) "Agency with
primary territorial jurisdiction" means a city or town police agency which
has responsibility for police activity within its boundaries; or a county
police or sheriff's department which has responsibility with regard to police
activity in the unincorporated areas within the county boundaries; or a
statutorily authorized port district police agency or four-year state college
or university police agency which has responsibility for police activity within
the statutorily authorized enforcement boundaries of the port district, state
college, or university.

(8) "Primary
commissioning agency" means (a) the employing agency in the case of a
general authority Washington peace officer, a limited authority Washington
peace officer, an Indian tribal peace officer, or a federal peace officer, and
(b) the commissioning agency in the case of a specially commissioned Washington
peace officer (i) who is performing functions within the course and scope of
the special commission and (ii) who is not also a general authority Washington
peace officer, a limited authority Washington peace officer, an Indian tribal
peace officer, or a federal peace officer.

(9) "Primary
function of an agency" means that function to which greater than fifty
percent of the agency's resources are allocated.

(10) "Mutual law
enforcement assistance" includes, but is not limited to, one or more law
enforcement agencies aiding or assisting one or more other such agencies
through loans or exchanges of personnel or of material resources, for law
enforcement purposes.

Sec. 2. RCW 10.93.140 and 1985 c
89 s 14 are each amended to read as follows:

This chapter does not
limit the scope of jurisdiction and authority of the Washington state patrol and
the department of fish and wildlife as otherwise provided by law, and ((the
Washington state patrol)) these agencies shall not be bound by the
reporting requirements of RCW 10.93.030.

Sec. 3. RCW 77.12.055 and 2000 c
107 s 212 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) Fish and wildlife
officers and ex officio fish and wildlife officers shall enforce this title,
rules of the department, and other statutes as prescribed by the legislature.
((However, when acting within the scope of these duties and when an offense
occurs in the presence of the fish and wildlife officer who is not an ex
officio fish and wildlife officer, the fish and wildlife officer may enforce
all criminal laws of the state. The fish and wildlife officer must have
successfully completed the basic law enforcement academy course sponsored by
the criminal justice training commission, or a course approved by the
department and the criminal justice training commission and provided by the
department or the criminal justice training commission, prior to enforcing the
criminal laws of the state.)) Fish and wildlife officers who are not ex
officio officers shall have and exercise, throughout the state, such police
powers and duties as are vested in sheriffs and peace officers generally. An
applicant for a fish and wildlife officer position must be a citizen of the
United States of America who can read and write the English language. All fish
and wildlife officers employed after the effective date of this section must
successfully complete the basic law enforcement academy course, known as the
basic course, sponsored by the criminal justice training commission, or the
basic law enforcement equivalency certification, known as the equivalency
course, provided by the criminal justice training commission. All officers
employed on the effective date of this section must have successfully completed
the basic course, the equivalency course, or the supplemental course in
criminal law enforcement, known as the supplemental course, offered under
chapter 155, Laws of 1985. Any officer who has not successfully completed the
basic course, the equivalency course, or the supplemental course must complete
the basic course or the equivalency course within fifteen months of the
effective date of this section.

(2) Fish and wildlife
officers are peace officers.

(3) Any liability or
claim of liability under chapter 4.92 RCW that arises out of the exercise or
alleged exercise of authority by a fish and wildlife officer rests with the
department unless the fish and wildlife officer acts under the direction and
control of another agency or unless the liability is otherwise assumed under an
agreement between the department and another agency.

(4) Fish and wildlife
officers may serve and execute warrants and processes issued by the courts.

(((5) Fish and
wildlife officers may enforce RCW 79.01.805 and 79.01.810.

(6) Fish and
wildlife officers are authorized to enforce all provisions of chapter 88.02 RCW
and any rules adopted under that chapter, and the provisions of RCW 79A.05.310
and any rules adopted under that section.

(7) To
enforce the laws of this title, fish and wildlife officers may call to their
aid any ex officio fish and wildlife officer or citizen and that person shall
render aid.))

---
END ---