BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF
WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1. RCW 47.06B.015 and 1999
c 385 s 3 are each amended to read as follows:

The legislature
recognizes that the state has a responsibility to address transportation needs
of persons with special transportation needs. Therefore, in order to
increase efficiency, to reduce waste and duplication, to enable people to
access social and health services, to provide a basic level of mobility, and to
extend and improve transportation services to people with special
transportation needs, the state shall implement the Program for Agency
Coordinated Transportation. The program will improve transportation efficiency
and effectiveness to maximize the use of community resources so that more
people can be served within available funding levels.

The Program for Agency
Coordinated Transportation will facilitate a statewide approach to coordination
and will support the development of community-based coordinated transportation
systems that exhibit the following characteristics:

(1) Organizations serving
persons with special transportation needs share responsibility for ensuring
that customers can access services.

(2) There is a single
entry process for customers to use to have trips arranged and scheduled, so the
customer does not have to contact different locations based on which sponsoring
agency or program is paying for the trip.

(3) A process is in
place so that when decisions are made by service organizations on facility
siting or program policy implementation, the costs of client transportation and
the potential effects on the client transportation costs of other agencies or
programs are considered. Affected agencies are given an opportunity to
influence the decision if the potential impact is negative.

(4) Open local market
mechanisms give all providers who meet minimum standards an opportunity to
participate in the program, and, in addition, allow for cost comparisons so
that purchasers can select the least expensive trip most appropriate to the
customer's needs.

(5) There is
flexibility in using the available vehicles in a community so that the ability
to transport people is not restricted by categorical claims to vehicles.

(6) There is maximum
sharing of operating facilities and administrative services, to avoid
duplication of costly program elements.

(7) Trip sponsors and
service providers have agreed on a process for allocating costs and billing
when they share use of vehicles.

(8) Minimum standards
exist for at least safety, driver training, maintenance, vehicles, and
technology to eliminate barriers that may prevent sponsors from using each
other's vehicles or serving each other's clients.

(9) The system is user
friendly. The fact that the system is supported by a multitude of programs and
agencies with different eligibility, contracting, service delivery, payment,
and funding structures does not negatively affect the customer's ability to
access service.

(10) Support is
provided for research, technology improvements, and sharing of best practices
from other communities, so that the system can be continually improved.

(11) There
are performance goals and an evaluation process that leads to continuous system
improvement.

--- END ---