BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF
WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec.
1. The legislature finds
that the United States Congress has enacted the mobile telecommunications
sourcing act for the purpose of establishing uniform nationwide sourcing rules
for state and local taxation of mobile telecommunications services. The legislature
desires to adopt implementing legislation governing taxation by the state and
by affected local taxing jurisdictions within the state. The legislature
recognizes that the federal act is intended to provide a clarification of
sourcing rules that is revenue-neutral among the states, and that the
clarifications required by the federal act are likely in fact to be
revenue-neutral at the state level. The legislature also desires to take
advantage of a provision of the federal act that allows a state with a
generally applicable business and occupation tax, such as this state, to make
the uniform sourcing rules elective for such tax. Any construction of this act
should reflect the legislature's intention to give effect to the federal act.
The new definitions of statutory terms provided in this act shall have no
impact on the interpretation of the existing laws of this state or of any
political subdivision of this state except as expressly set forth in this act.

Sec. 2. RCW 82.04.065 and 1997 c
304 s 5 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) "Competitive
telephone service" means the providing by any person of telecommunications
equipment or apparatus, or service related to that equipment or apparatus such
as repair or maintenance service, if the equipment or apparatus is of a type
which can be provided by persons that are not subject to regulation as
telephone companies under Title 80 RCW and for which a separate charge is made.

(2) "Network
telephone service" means the providing by any person of access to a local
telephone network, local telephone network switching service, toll service, or
coin telephone services, or the providing of telephonic, video, data, or
similar communication or transmission for hire, via a local telephone network,
toll line or channel, cable, microwave, or similar communication or
transmission system. "Network telephone service" includes interstate
service, including toll service, originating from or received on
telecommunications equipment or apparatus in this state if the charge for the
service is billed to a person in this state. With respect to a home service
provider of mobile telecommunications services: (a) "Network telephone
service" includes mobile telecommunications services provided to its
customers in any taxing jurisdiction, the charges for which are billed by or
for the home service provider, irrespective of whether the services are
provided by the home service provider; and (b) "network telephone
service" does not include mobile telecommunications services provided to
persons other than the home service provider's customers. "Network
telephone service" includes the provision of transmission to and from the
site of an internet provider via a local telephone network, toll line or
channel, cable, microwave, or similar communication or transmission system.
"Network telephone service" does not include the providing of
competitive telephone service, the providing of cable television service, the
providing of broadcast services by radio or television stations, nor the
provision of internet service as defined in RCW 82.04.297, including the
reception of dial-in connection, provided at the site of the internet service
provider.

(3) "Telephone
service" means competitive telephone service or network telephone service,
or both, as defined in subsections (1) and (2) of this section.

(4) "Telephone
business" means the business of providing network telephone service, as
defined in subsection (2) of this section. It includes cooperative or farmer
line telephone companies or associations operating an exchange.

(5) "Charges
for mobile telecommunications services" means any charge for, or
associated with, the provision of commercial mobile radio service, as defined
in section 20.3, Title 47 C.F.R. as in effect on June 1, 1999, or any charge
for, or associated with, a service provided as an adjunct to a commercial
mobile radio service, that is billed to the customer by or for the customer's
home service provider regardless of whether individual transmissions originate
or terminate within the licensed service area of the home service provider.

(6)
"Customer" means: (a) The person or entity that contracts with the
home service provider for mobile telecommunications services; or (b) the end
user of the mobile telecommunications service, if the end user of mobile
telecommunications services is not the contracting party, but this clause
applies only for the purpose of determining the place of primary use. Without
implication for the general definition of "customer," the term does
not include a reseller of mobile telecommunications service, or a serving
carrier under an arrangement to serve the customer outside the home service
provider's licensed service area.

(7) "Designated
data base provider" means a corporation, association, or other entity
representing all the political subdivisions of the state that is:

(a) Responsible for
providing an electronic data base prescribed in 4 U.S.C. Sec. 119(a) if the
state has not provided an electronic data base; and

(b) Approved by
municipal and county associations or leagues of the state whose responsibility
it would otherwise be to provide a data base prescribed by 4 U.S.C. Secs. 116
through 126.

(8) "Enhanced
zip code" means a United States postal zip code of nine or more digits.

(9) "Home
service provider" means the facilities-based carrier or reseller when the
customer contracts for the provision of mobile telecommunications services.

(10) "Licensed
service area" means the geographic area in which the home service provider
is authorized by law or contract to provide commercial mobile radio service to
the customer.

(11) "Mobile
telecommunications service" means commercial mobile radio service, as
defined in section 20.3, Title 47 C.F.R. as in effect on June 1, 1999.

(12) "Place of
primary use" means the street address representative of where the
customer's use of the mobile telecommunications service primarily occurs, which
must be:

(a) The residential
street address or the primary business street address of the customer; and

(b) Within the
licensed service area of the home service provider.

(13) "Prepaid
telephone calling service" means the right to purchase exclusively
telecommunications services that must be paid for in advance, that enables the
origination of calls using an access number, authorization code, or both,
whether manually or electronically dialed, if the remaining amount of units of
service that have been prepaid is known by the provider of the prepaid service
on a continuous basis.

(14)
"Reseller" means a provider who purchases telecommunications services
from another telecommunications service provider and then resells, uses as a
component part of, or integrates the purchased services into a mobile
telecommunications service. "Reseller" does not include a serving
carrier when a home service provider arranges for the services to its customers
outside the home service provider's licensed service area.

(15) "Serving
carrier" means a facilities-based carrier providing mobile
telecommunications service to a customer outside a home service provider's or
reseller's licensed service area.

(16) "Taxing
jurisdiction" means any of the several states, the District of Columbia,
or any territory or possession of the United States, any municipality, city,
county, township, parish, transportation district, or assessment jurisdiction,
or other political subdivision within the territorial limits of the United
States with the authority to impose a tax, charge, or fee.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
3. A new section is added
to chapter 82.04 RCW to read as follows:

(1) Notwithstanding the
provisions of RCW 82.04.065(2), a home service provider that is subject to tax
under RCW 82.04.250 may elect, for purposes of the taxes payable under this
chapter only, to calculate its gross proceeds of sales by including charges for
mobile communications services provided within this state to all consumers,
irrespective of whether they are the home service provider's customers, and
excluding charges billed by or for the home service provider for mobile
telecommunications services provided to its customers outside the home service
provider's licensed service areas in this state. This election shall be made
by written notice to the department dated prior to the effective date of this
act, or with respect to any tax year thereafter, prior to the beginning of the
tax year, and may be revoked by the taxpayer by the same method with respect to
any tax year after a tax year to which this election applies. If no election
is made by a taxpayer pursuant to this section, it is presumed that the
taxpayer's calculation of gross proceeds of sales is consistent with RCW
82.04.065(2).

(2) This chapter does
not apply to amounts received by a home service provider of mobile
telecommunications services, with respect to which an election provided for in
subsection (1) of this section is not then in effect, with respect to the
provision of services to consumers whose place of primary use is outside this
state.

(3) As used in this
section, "customer," "home service provider,"
"licensed service area," "mobile telecommunications
services," and "place of primary use" have the meaning given in
RCW 82.04.065.

Sec. 4. RCW 82.08.0289 and 1983
2nd ex.s. c 3 s 30 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) The tax levied by
RCW 82.08.020 shall not apply to sales of:

(a) Network telephone
service, other than toll service, to residential customers.

(b) Network telephone
service which is paid for by inserting coins in coin-operated telephones.

(c) Network
telephone service consisting of mobile telecommunications services, including
any toll service, provided to any customer whose place of primary use is
outside this state.

(2) As used in this
section:

(a) "Network
telephone service," ((has)) "customer,"
"mobile telecommunications services," and "place of primary
use" have the meaning given in RCW 82.04.065.

(b) "Residential
customer" means an individual subscribing to a residential class of
telephone service.

(c) "Toll
service" does not include customer access line charges for access to a
toll calling network.

Sec. 5. RCW 82.14.020 and 1997 c
201 s 1 are each amended to read as follows:

For purposes of this
chapter:

(1) A retail sale
consisting solely of the sale of tangible personal property shall be deemed to
have occurred at the retail outlet at or from which delivery is made to the
consumer;

(2) A retail sale
consisting essentially of the performance of personal business or professional
services shall be deemed to have occurred at the place at which such services
were primarily performed, except that for the performance of a tow truck
service, as defined in RCW 46.55.010, the retail sale shall be deemed to have
occurred at the place of business of the operator of the tow truck service;

(3) A retail sale
consisting of the rental of tangible personal property shall be deemed to have
occurred (a) in the case of a rental involving periodic rental payments, at the
primary place of use by the lessee during the period covered by each payment,
or (b) in all other cases, at the place of first use by the lessee;

(4) A retail sale
within the scope of the second paragraph of RCW 82.04.050, and a retail sale of
taxable personal property to be installed by the seller shall be deemed to have
occurred at the place where the labor and services involved were primarily
performed;

(5) A retail sale
consisting of the providing to a consumer of telephone service, as defined in
RCW 82.04.065, other than a sale of tangible personal property under subsection
(1) of this section or a rental of tangible personal property under subsection
(3) of this section, shall be deemed to have occurred at the situs of the
telephone or other instrument through which the telephone service is rendered.
However, telephone service consisting of mobile telecommunications services
deemed to have been provided by a home service provider, as specified in RCW
82.04.065(2), is deemed to have occurred at the customer's place of primary
use, regardless of where the mobile telecommunications services originate,
terminate, or pass through;

(6) "City"
means a city or town;

(7) The meaning
ascribed to words and phrases in chapters 82.04, 82.08 and 82.12 RCW, as now or
hereafter amended, insofar as applicable, shall have full force and effect with
respect to taxes imposed under authority of this chapter;

(8) "Taxable
event" shall mean any retail sale, or any use of an article of tangible
personal property, upon which a state tax is imposed pursuant to chapter 82.08
or 82.12 RCW, as they now exist or may hereafter be amended: PROVIDED,
HOWEVER, That the term shall not include a retail sale taxable pursuant to RCW
82.08.150, as now or hereafter amended;

(9) "Treasurer or
other legal depository" shall mean the treasurer or legal depository of a
county or city.

Sec. 6. RCW 82.14B.030 and 1998
c 304 s 3 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) The legislative
authority of a county may impose a county enhanced 911 excise tax on the use of
switched access lines in an amount not exceeding fifty cents per month for each
switched access line. The amount of tax shall be uniform for each switched
access line. Each county shall provide notice of such tax to all local
exchange companies serving in the county at least sixty days in advance of the
date on which the first payment is due.

(2) The legislative authority
of a county may also impose a county 911 excise tax on the use of radio access
lines located within the county in an amount not exceeding twenty-five cents
per month for each radio access line. The location of a radio access line
is the user's place of primary use, as defined in RCW 82.04.065. The
amount of tax shall be uniform for each radio access line. The county shall
provide notice of such tax to all radio communications service companies
serving in the county at least sixty days in advance of the date on which the
first payment is due. Any county imposing this tax shall include in its
ordinance a refund mechanism whereby the amount of any tax ordered to be
refunded by the judgment of a court of record, or as a result of the resolution
of any appeal therefrom, shall be refunded to the radio communications service
company or local exchange company that collected the tax, and those companies
shall reimburse the subscribers who paid the tax. The ordinance shall further
provide that to the extent the subscribers who paid the tax cannot be
identified or located, the tax paid by those subscribers shall be returned to
the county.

(3) A state enhanced
911 excise tax is imposed on all switched access lines in the state. The
amount of tax shall not exceed twenty cents per month for each switched access
line. The tax shall be uniform for each switched access line. The tax imposed
under this subsection shall be remitted to the department of revenue by local
exchange companies on a tax return provided by the department. Tax proceeds
shall be deposited by the treasurer in the enhanced 911 account created in RCW
38.52.540.

(4) By August 31st of
each year the state enhanced 911 coordinator shall recommend the level for the
next year of the state enhanced 911 excise tax, based on a systematic cost and
revenue analysis, to the utilities and transportation commission. The
commission shall by the following October 31st determine the level of the state
enhanced 911 excise tax for the following year.

Sec. 7. RCW 35.21.714 and 1989 c
103 s 1 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) Any city
which imposes a license fee or tax upon the business activity of engaging in
the telephone business, as defined in RCW 82.04.065, which is measured by gross
receipts or gross income may impose the fee or tax, if it desires, on one
hundred percent of the total gross revenue derived from intrastate toll
telephone services subject to the fee or tax((: PROVIDED, That)),
and shall impose the fee or tax upon the gross income of home service providers
derived from providing mobile telecommunications services, to the extent the
services are included in network telephone service, as defined in RCW
82.04.065, that are charged to customers whose place of primary use is within
the city. However, the city shall not impose the fee or tax on that
portion of network telephone service, as defined in RCW 82.04.065, which
represents charges to another telecommunications company, as defined in RCW
80.04.010, for connecting fees, switching charges, or carrier access charges
relating to intrastate toll telephone services, or for access to, or charges
for, interstate services, or charges for network telephone service that is
purchased for the purpose of resale, or charges for mobile
telecommunications services provided to customers whose place of primary use is
not within the city.

(2) Any city to
which subsection (1) of this section applies has the authority, rights, and
obligations of a taxing jurisdiction as set forth in sections 9 through 13 of
this act.

(3) As used in this
section, "customer," "home service provider," "mobile
telecommunications services," and "place of primary use" have
the meaning given in RCW 82.04.065.

Sec. 8. RCW 35A.82.060 and 1989
c 103 s 3 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) Any code
city which imposes a license fee or tax upon the business activity of engaging
in the telephone business, as defined in RCW 82.04.065, which is measured by
gross receipts or gross income may impose the fee or tax, if it desires, on one
hundred percent of the total gross revenue derived from intrastate toll
telephone services subject to the fee or tax((: PROVIDED, That)),
and shall impose the fee or tax upon the gross income of home service providers
derived from providing mobile telecommunications services, to the extent the
services are included in network telephone service, as defined in RCW
82.04.065, that are charged to customers whose place of primary use is within
the city. However, the city shall not impose the fee or tax on that
portion of network telephone service, as defined in RCW 82.04.065, which
represents charges to another telecommunications company, as defined in RCW
80.04.010, for connecting fees, switching charges, or carrier access charges
relating to intrastate toll telephone services, or for access to, or charges
for, interstate services, or charges for network telephone service that is
purchased for the purpose of resale, or charges for mobile telecommunications
services provided to customers whose place of primary use is not within the
city.

(2) Any city to
which subsection (1) of this section applies has the authority, rights, and
obligations of a taxing jurisdiction as set forth in sections 9 through 13 of
this act.

(3) As used in this
section, "customer," "home service provider," "mobile
telecommunications services," and "place of primary use" have
the meaning given in RCW 82.04.065.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
9. A new section is added
to chapter 82.32 RCW to read as follows:

(1)(a) The department
may provide an electronic data base to a home service provider, or if the
department does not provide an electronic data base to home service providers,
then the designated data base provider may provide an electronic data base to a
home service provider.

(b)(i) An electronic
data base, whether provided by the department or the designated data base
provider, shall be provided in a format approved by the American national
standards institute's accredited standards committee X12, that after allowing
for de minimis deviations, designates for each street address in the state,
including to the extent practicable, any multiple postal street addresses
applicable to one street location, the appropriate taxing jurisdictions, and
the appropriate code for each taxing jurisdiction, for each level of taxing
jurisdiction, identified by one nationwide standard numeric code.

(ii) An electronic data
base shall also provide the appropriate code for each street address with
respect to political subdivisions which are not taxing jurisdictions when
reasonably needed to determine the proper taxing jurisdiction.

(iii) The nationwide
standard numeric codes shall contain the same number of numeric digits with
each digit or combination of digits referring to the same level of taxing
jurisdiction throughout the United States using a format similar to FIPS 55-3
or other appropriate standard approved by the federation of tax administrators
and the multistate tax commission, or their successors. Each address shall be
provided in standard postal format.

(2) The department or
designated data base provider, as the case may be, that provides or maintains
an electronic data base described in subsection (1) of this section shall
provide notice of the availability of the then current electronic data base,
and any subsequent revisions, by publication in the manner normally employed
for the publication of informational tax, charge, or fee notices to taxpayers
in the state.

(3) A home service
provider using the data contained in an electronic data base described in
subsection (1) of this section shall be held harmless from any tax, charge, or
fee liability that otherwise would be due solely as a result of any error or
omission in the data base provided by the department or designated data base
provider. The home service provider shall reflect changes made to the data
base during a calendar quarter not later than thirty days after the end of the
calendar quarter if the department or designated data base provider, as the
case may be, has issued notice of the availability of an electronic data base
reflecting the changes under subsection (2) of this section.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
10. A new section is added
to chapter 82.32 RCW to read as follows:

(1) If neither the
department nor the designated data base provider provides an electronic data
base under section 9 of this act, a home service provider shall be held
harmless from any tax, charge, or fee liability in any taxing jurisdiction in
this state that otherwise would be due solely as a result of an assignment of a
street address to an incorrect taxing jurisdiction if, subject to section 11 of
this act, the home service provider employs an enhanced zip code to assign each
street address to a specific taxing jurisdiction for each level of taxing
jurisdiction and exercises due diligence at each level of taxing jurisdiction
to ensure that each street address is assigned to the correct taxing
jurisdiction. If an enhanced zip code overlaps boundaries of taxing
jurisdictions of the same level, the home service provider must designate one
specific jurisdiction within the enhanced zip code for use in taxing the
activity for such enhanced zip code for each level of taxing jurisdiction. Any
enhanced zip code assignment changed in accordance with section 11 of this act
is deemed to be in compliance with this section. For purposes of this section,
there is a rebuttable presumption that a home service provider has exercised
due diligence if the home service provider demonstrates that it has:

(a) Expended reasonable
resources to implement and maintain an appropriately detailed electronic data
base of street address assignments to taxing jurisdictions;

(b) Implemented and
maintained reasonable internal controls to promptly correct misassignments of
street addresses to taxing jurisdictions; and

(c) Used all reasonably
obtainable and usable data pertaining to municipal annexations, incorporations,
reorganizations, and any other changes in jurisdictional boundaries that
materially affect the accuracy of the data base.

(2) Subsection (1) of
this section applies to a home service provider that is in compliance with the
requirements of subsection (1) of this section, if in this state an electronic
data base has not been provided under section 9 of this act, until the later
of:

(a) Eighteen months
after the nationwide standard numeric code described in section 9(1) of this
act has been approved by the federation of tax administrators and the
multistate tax commission; or

(b) Six months after
the department or a designated data base provider in this state provides the
data base as prescribed in section 9(1) of this act.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
11. A new section is added
to chapter 82.32 RCW to read as follows:

A taxing jurisdiction,
or the department on behalf of any taxing jurisdiction or taxing jurisdictions
within this state, may:

(1) Determine that the
address used for purposes of determining the taxing jurisdictions to which
taxes, charges, or fees for mobile telecommunications services are remitted
does not meet the definition of place of primary use in RCW 82.04.065 and give
binding notice to the home service provider to change the place of primary use
on a prospective basis from the date of notice of determination if:

(a) The authority
making the determination is not the department, the taxing jurisdiction obtains
the consent of all affected taxing jurisdictions within the state before giving
the notice of determination; and

(b) Before the taxing
jurisdiction gives the notice of determination, the customer is given an
opportunity to demonstrate in accordance with applicable state or local tax,
charge, or fee administrative procedures that the address is the customer's
place of primary use; and

(2) Determine that the
assignment of a taxing jurisdiction by a home service provider under section 10
of this act does not reflect the correct taxing jurisdiction and give binding
notice to the home service provider to change the assignment on a prospective
basis from the date of notice of determination if:

(a) The authority
making the determination is not the department, the taxing jurisdiction obtains
the consent of all affected taxing jurisdictions within the state before giving
the notice of determination; and

(b) The home service
provider is given an opportunity to demonstrate in accordance with applicable
state or local tax, charge, or fee administrative procedures that the
assignment reflects the correct taxing jurisdiction.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
12. A new section is added
to chapter 82.32 RCW to read as follows:

(1) A home service
provider is responsible for obtaining and maintaining the customer's place of
primary use, as defined in RCW 82.04.065. Subject to section 11 of this act,
and if the home service provider's reliance on information provided by its
customer is in good faith, a taxing jurisdiction shall:

(a) Allow a home
service provider to rely on the applicable residential or business street
address supplied by the home service provider's customer; and

(b) Not hold a home
service provider liable for any additional taxes, charges, or fees based on a
different determination of the place of primary use for taxes, charges, or fees
that are customarily charged to or passed on to the customer as a separate
itemized charge.

(2) Except as provided
in section 11 of this act, a taxing jurisdiction shall allow a home service
provider to treat the address used by the home service provider for tax
purposes for any customer under a service contract or agreement in effect on
August 1, 2002, as that customer's place of primary use for the remaining term
of the service contract or agreement, excluding any extension or renewal of the
service contract or agreement, for purposes of determining the taxing
jurisdictions to which taxes, charges, or fees on charges for mobile
telecommunications services are remitted.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
13. A new section is added
to chapter 82.32 RCW to read as follows:

(1) Nothing in this act
modifies, impairs, supersedes, or authorizes the modification, impairment, or
supersession of, any law allowing a taxing jurisdiction to collect a tax,
charge, or fee from a customer that has failed to provide its place of primary
use.

(2) If a taxing
jurisdiction does not otherwise subject charges for mobile telecommunications
services to taxation and if these charges are aggregated with and not
separately stated from charges that are subject to taxation, then the charges
for nontaxable mobile telecommunications services may be subject to taxation
unless the home service provider can reasonably identify charges not subject to
the tax, charge, or fee from its books and records that are kept in the regular
course of business.

(3) If a taxing
jurisdiction does not subject charges for mobile telecommunications services to
taxation, a customer may not rely upon the nontaxability of charges for mobile
telecommunications services unless the customer's home service provider
separately states the charges for nontaxable mobile telecommunications services
from taxable charges or the home service provider elects, after receiving a
written request from the customer in the form required by the provider, to
provide verifiable data based upon the home service provider's books and
records that are kept in the regular course of business that reasonably
identifies the nontaxable charges.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
14. A new section is added
to chapter 82.32 RCW to read as follows:

The definitions
provided in RCW 82.04.065 apply to sections 9 through 13 of this act as
applicable.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
15. A new section is added
to chapter 35.21 RCW to read as follows:

(1) If a customer
believes that an amount of city tax or an assignment of place of primary use or
taxing jurisdiction included on a billing for mobile telecommunications
services is erroneous, the customer shall notify the home service provider in
writing. The customer shall include in this written notification the street
address for the customer's place of primary use, the account name and number
for which the customer seeks a correction, a description of the error asserted
by the customer, and any other information that the home service provider
reasonably requires to process the request. Within sixty days of receiving a
notice under this section, the home service provider shall review its records
and the electronic data base or enhanced zip code used pursuant to sections 9
and 10 of this act to determine the customer's taxing jurisdiction. If this
review shows that the amount of tax, charge, or fee or assignment of place of
primary use or taxing jurisdiction is in error, the home service provider shall
correct the error and refund or credit the amount of tax, charge, or fee
erroneously collected from the customer for a period of up to two years. If
this review shows that the amount of tax, charge, or fee or assignment of place
of primary use or taxing jurisdiction is correct, the home service provider
shall provide a written explanation to the customer.

(2) If the customer is
dissatisfied with the response of the home service provider under this section,
the customer may seek a correction and/or refund from the affected city.

(3) The procedures in
this section are the sole and exclusive remedy available to customers seeking
correction of assignment of place of primary use or taxing jurisdiction, or a
refund of or other compensation for taxes, charges, and/or fees erroneously
collected by the home service provider.

(4) The definitions
provided in RCW 82.04.065 apply to this section as applicable.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
16. A new section is added
to chapter 35A.82 RCW to read as follows:

(1) If a customer
believes that an amount of city tax or an assignment of place of primary use or
taxing jurisdiction included on a billing for mobile telecommunications
services is erroneous, the customer shall notify the home service provider in
writing. The customer shall include in this written notification the street
address for the customer's place of primary use, the account name and mobile
telephone number for which the customer seeks a correction of the tax, a
description of the error asserted by the customer, including the jurisdiction
which the customer believes is the correct assignment, if applicable, and the
amount of tax the customer believes has been charged in error. Within sixty
days of receiving a notice under this section, the home service provider shall
review its records and the electronic data base or enhanced zip code used
pursuant to sections 9 and 10 of this act to determine the customer's taxing
jurisdiction. If this review shows that the amount of tax, charge, or fee or
assignment of place of primary use or taxing jurisdiction is in error, the home
service provider shall correct the error and refund or credit the amount of
tax, charge, or fee erroneously collected from the customer for a period of up
to two years. If this review shows that the amount of tax, charge, or fee or
assignment of place of primary use or taxing jurisdiction is correct, the home
service provider shall provide a written explanation to the customer.

(2) If the customer is
dissatisfied with the response of the home service provider under this section,
the customer may seek a correction and/or refund from the affected city.

(3) The procedures in
this section are the first course of remedy available to customers seeking
correction of assignment of place of primary use or taxing jurisdiction, or a
refund of or other compensation for taxes, charges, or fees erroneously
collected by the home service provider, and no cause of action seeking such
correction or refund or other compensation shall be maintained on behalf of a
customer unless and until that customer has timely followed the procedures set
forth in this section.

(4) The definitions
provided in RCW 82.04.065 apply to this section as applicable.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
17. (1) If a court of
competent jurisdiction enters a final judgment on the merits that (a) is based
on federal law, (b) is no longer subject to appeal, and (c) substantially
limits or impairs the essential elements of 4 U.S.C. Secs. 116 through 126,
this act shall be deemed invalid and shall have no legal effect as of the date
of entry of such judgment.

(2) Except as provided
in subsection (1) of this section, if any provision of this act or its
application to any person or circumstance is held invalid based on federal or
state law, the remainder of the act or the application of the provision to
other persons or circumstances is not affected.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 18. This act is necessary for
the immediate preservation of the public peace, health, or safety, or support
of the state government and its existing public institutions, and takes effect
July 1, 2001. However, the amendments made by this act with respect to tax
liabilities apply only to charges on or revenues from customer bills issued on
or after August 1, 2002.

---
END ---