BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF
WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1. RCW 48.21.045 and 1995 c
265 s 14 are each amended to read as follows:

(1)(a) An insurer
offering any health benefit plan to a small employer shall offer and actively
market to the small employer a health benefit plan ((providing benefits
identical to the schedule of covered health services that are required to be
delivered to an individual enrolled in the basic health plan)) featuring
a limited schedule of covered health services and lower premium costs than
would otherwise be available. Nothing in this subsection shall preclude an
insurer from offering, or a small employer from purchasing, other health
benefit plans that may have more ((or less)) comprehensive benefits than
((the basic health plan,)) provided ((such plans are in accordance
with this chapter)) by this subsection. An insurer offering a
health benefit plan ((that does not include benefits in the basic health
plan)) under this section shall clearly disclose ((these
differences)) all covered benefits to the small employer in a
brochure approved by the commissioner.

(b) A health benefit
plan offered under this subsection shall provide coverage for hospital
expenses and services rendered by a physician licensed under chapter 18.57 or
18.71 RCW but is not subject to the requirements of RCW 48.21.130, 48.21.140,
48.21.141, 48.21.142, 48.21.144, 48.21.146, 48.21.160 through 48.21.197,
48.21.200, 48.21.220, 48.21.225, 48.21.230, 48.21.235, 48.21.240, 48.21.244,
48.21.250, 48.21.300, 48.21.310, or 48.21.320 if ((: (i) The health benefit
plan is the mandatory offering under (a) of this subsection that provides
benefits identical to the basic health plan, to the extent these requirements
differ from the basic health plan; or (ii))) the health benefit plan is
offered to employers with not more than ((twenty-five)) fifty
employees or to associations or member-governed groups formed specifically
for the purpose of purchasing health care.

(2) Nothing in this
section shall prohibit an insurer from offering, or a purchaser from seeking,
benefits in excess of the ((basic health plan services)) benefits
offered under subsection (1) of this section. All forms, policies, and
contracts shall be submitted for approval to the commissioner, and the rates of
any plan offered under this section shall be reasonable in relation to the
benefits thereto.

(3) Premium rates for
health benefit plans for small employers as defined in this section shall be
subject to the following provisions:

(a) The insurer shall
develop its rates based on an adjusted community rate and may only vary the
adjusted community rate for:

(i) Geographic area;

(ii) Family size;

(iii) Age; and

(iv) Wellness
activities.

(b) The adjustment for
age in (a)(iii) of this subsection may not use age brackets smaller than
five-year increments, which shall begin with age twenty and end with age
sixty-five. Employees under the age of twenty shall be treated as those age
twenty.

(c) The insurer shall
be permitted to develop separate rates for individuals age sixty-five or older
for coverage for which medicare is the primary payer and coverage for which
medicare is not the primary payer. Both rates shall be subject to the requirements
of this subsection (3).

(d) The permitted rates
for any age group shall be no more than four hundred twenty-five percent of the
lowest rate for all age groups on January 1, 1996, four hundred percent on
January 1, 1997, and three hundred seventy-five percent on January 1, 2000, and
thereafter.

(e) A discount for
wellness activities shall be permitted to reflect actuarially justified
differences in utilization or cost attributed to such programs not to exceed
twenty percent.

(f) The rate charged
for a health benefit plan offered under this section may not be adjusted more
frequently than annually except that the premium may be changed to reflect:

(i) Changes to the
enrollment of the small employer;

(ii) Changes to the
family composition of the employee;

(iii) Changes to the
health benefit plan requested by the small employer; or

(iv) Changes in
government requirements affecting the health benefit plan.

(g) Rating factors
shall produce premiums for identical groups that differ only by the amounts attributable
to plan design, with the exception of discounts for health improvement
programs.

(h) For the purposes of
this section, a health benefit plan that contains a restricted network
provision shall not be considered similar coverage to a health benefit plan
that does not contain such a provision, provided that the restrictions of
benefits to network providers result in substantial differences in claims
costs. This subsection does not restrict or enhance the portability of
benefits as provided in RCW 48.43.015.

(i) Adjusted community
rates established under this section shall pool the medical experience of all
small groups purchasing coverage.

(4) ((The health
benefit plans authorized by this section that are lower than the required
offering shall not supplant or supersede any existing policy for the benefit of
employees in this state.))

Nothing in this section
shall restrict the right of employees to collectively bargain for insurance
providing benefits in excess of those provided herein.

(5)(a) Except as
provided in this subsection, requirements used by an insurer in determining
whether to provide coverage to a small employer shall be applied uniformly
among all small employers applying for coverage or receiving coverage from the
carrier.

(b) An insurer shall
not require a minimum participation level greater than:

(i) One hundred percent
of eligible employees working for groups with three or less employees; and

(ii) Seventy-five
percent of eligible employees working for groups with more than three
employees.

(c) In applying minimum
participation requirements with respect to a small employer, a small employer
shall not consider employees or dependents who have similar existing coverage
in determining whether the applicable percentage of participation is met.

(d) An insurer may not
increase any requirement for minimum employee participation or modify any
requirement for minimum employer contribution applicable to a small employer at
any time after the small employer has been accepted for coverage.

(6) An insurer must
offer coverage to all eligible employees of a small employer and their
dependents. An insurer may not offer coverage to only certain individuals or
dependents in a small employer group or to only part of the group. An insurer
may not modify a health plan with respect to a small employer or any eligible
employee or dependent, through riders, endorsements or otherwise, to restrict
or exclude coverage or benefits for specific diseases, medical conditions, or
services otherwise covered by the plan.

(7) As used in this
section, "health benefit plan," "small employer,"
"basic health plan," "adjusted community rate," and
"wellness activities" mean the same as defined in RCW 48.43.005.

Sec. 2. RCW 48.44.023 and 1995 c
265 s 16 are each amended to read as follows:

(1)(a) A health care
service((s)) contractor offering any health benefit plan to a small
employer shall offer and actively market to the small employer a health benefit
plan ((providing benefits identical to the schedule of covered health
services that are required to be delivered to an individual enrolled in the
basic health plan)) featuring a limited schedule of covered health
services and lower premium costs than would otherwise be available.
Nothing in this subsection shall preclude a contractor from offering, or a
small employer from purchasing, other health benefit plans that may have more
((or less)) comprehensive benefits than ((the basic health plan,))
provided ((such plans are in accordance with this chapter)) by this
subsection. A contractor offering a health benefit plan ((that does not
include benefits in the basic health plan)) under this section shall
clearly disclose ((these differences)) all covered benefits to
the small employer in a brochure approved by the commissioner.

(b) A health benefit
plan offered under this subsection shall provide coverage for hospital
expenses and services rendered by a physician licensed under chapter 18.57 or
18.71 RCW but is not subject to the requirements of RCW 48.44.225, 48.44.240,
48.44.245, 48.44.290, 48.44.300, 48.44.310, 48.44.320, 48.44.325, 48.44.330,
48.44.335, 48.44.340, 48.44.344, 48.44.360, 48.44.400, 48.44.440, 48.44.450,
and 48.44.460 if((: (i) The health benefit plan is the mandatory offering
under (a) of this subsection that provides benefits identical to the basic
health plan, to the extent these requirements differ from the basic health
plan; or (ii))) the health benefit plan is offered to employers with not
more than ((twenty-five)) fifty employees or to associations
or member-governed groups formed specifically for the purpose of purchasing
health care.

(2) Nothing in this
section shall prohibit a health care service contractor from offering, or a
purchaser from seeking, benefits in excess of the ((basic health plan
services)) benefits offered under subsection (1) of this section.
All forms, policies, and contracts shall be submitted for approval to the
commissioner, and the rates of any plan offered under this section shall be
reasonable in relation to the benefits thereto.

(3) Premium rates for
health benefit plans for small employers as defined in this section shall be
subject to the following provisions:

(a) The contractor
shall develop its rates based on an adjusted community rate and may only vary
the adjusted community rate for:

(i) Geographic area;

(ii) Family size;

(iii) Age; and

(iv) Wellness
activities.

(b) The adjustment for
age in (a)(iii) of this subsection may not use age brackets smaller than five-year
increments, which shall begin with age twenty and end with age sixty-five.
Employees under the age of twenty shall be treated as those age twenty.

(c) The contractor
shall be permitted to develop separate rates for individuals age sixty-five or
older for coverage for which medicare is the primary payer and coverage for
which medicare is not the primary payer. Both rates shall be subject to the
requirements of this subsection (3).

(d) The permitted rates
for any age group shall be no more than four hundred twenty-five percent of the
lowest rate for all age groups on January 1, 1996, four hundred percent on
January 1, 1997, and three hundred seventy-five percent on January 1, 2000, and
thereafter.

(e) A discount for
wellness activities shall be permitted to reflect actuarially justified
differences in utilization or cost attributed to such programs not to exceed
twenty percent.

(f) The rate charged
for a health benefit plan offered under this section may not be adjusted more
frequently than annually except that the premium may be changed to reflect:

(i) Changes to the
enrollment of the small employer;

(ii) Changes to the
family composition of the employee;

(iii) Changes to the
health benefit plan requested by the small employer; or

(iv) Changes in
government requirements affecting the health benefit plan.

(g) Rating factors
shall produce premiums for identical groups that differ only by the amounts
attributable to plan design, with the exception of discounts for health
improvement programs.

(h) For the purposes of
this section, a health benefit plan that contains a restricted network
provision shall not be considered similar coverage to a health benefit plan
that does not contain such a provision, provided that the restrictions of
benefits to network providers result in substantial differences in claims
costs. This subsection does not restrict or enhance the portability of
benefits as provided in RCW 48.43.015.

(i) Adjusted community
rates established under this section shall pool the medical experience of all
groups purchasing coverage.

(4) ((The health
benefit plans authorized by this section that are lower than the required
offering shall not supplant or supersede any existing policy for the benefit of
employees in this state.))

Nothing in this section
shall restrict the right of employees to collectively bargain for insurance
providing benefits in excess of those provided herein.

(5)(a) Except as
provided in this subsection, requirements used by a contractor in determining
whether to provide coverage to a small employer shall be applied uniformly
among all small employers applying for coverage or receiving coverage from the
carrier.

(b) A contractor shall
not require a minimum participation level greater than:

(i) One hundred percent
of eligible employees working for groups with three or less employees; and

(ii) Seventy-five
percent of eligible employees working for groups with more than three
employees.

(c) In applying minimum
participation requirements with respect to a small employer, a small employer
shall not consider employees or dependents who have similar existing coverage
in determining whether the applicable percentage of participation is met.

(d) A contractor may
not increase any requirement for minimum employee participation or modify any
requirement for minimum employer contribution applicable to a small employer at
any time after the small employer has been accepted for coverage.

(6) A contractor must
offer coverage to all eligible employees of a small employer and their
dependents. A contractor may not offer coverage to only certain individuals or
dependents in a small employer group or to only part of the group. A
contractor may not modify a health plan with respect to a small employer or any
eligible employee or dependent, through riders, endorsements or otherwise, to
restrict or exclude coverage or benefits for specific diseases, medical
conditions, or services otherwise covered by the plan.

Sec. 3. RCW 48.46.066 and 1995 c
265 s 18 are each amended to read as follows:

(1)(a) A health
maintenance organization offering any health benefit plan to a small employer
shall offer and actively market to the small employer a health benefit plan ((providing
benefits identical to the schedule of covered health services that are required
to be delivered to an individual enrolled in the basic health plan)) featuring
a limited schedule of covered health services and lower premium costs than
would otherwise be available. Nothing in this subsection shall preclude a
health maintenance organization from offering, or a small employer from
purchasing, other health benefit plans that may have more ((or less))
comprehensive benefits than ((the basic health plan,)) provided ((such
plans are in accordance with this chapter)) by this subsection. A
health maintenance organization offering a health benefit plan ((that does
not include benefits in the basic health plan)) under this section
shall clearly disclose ((these differences)) all covered benefits
to the small employer in a brochure approved by the commissioner.

(b) A health benefit
plan offered under this subsection shall provide coverage for hospital
expenses and services rendered by a physician licensed under chapter 18.57 or
18.71 RCW but is not subject to the requirements of RCW 48.46.275, 48.46.280,
48.46.285, 48.46.290, 48.46.350, 48.46.355, 48.46.375, 48.46.440, 48.46.480,
48.46.510, 48.46.520, and 48.46.530 if((: (i) The health benefit plan is
the mandatory offering under (a) of this subsection that provides benefits
identical to the basic health plan, to the extent these requirements differ
from the basic health plan; or (ii))) the health benefit plan is offered to
employers with not more than ((twenty-five)) fifty employees or
to associations or member-governed groups formed specifically for the purpose
of purchasing health care.

(2) Nothing in this
section shall prohibit a health maintenance organization from offering, or a
purchaser from seeking, benefits in excess of the ((basic health plan
services)) benefits offered under subsection (1) of this section.
All forms, policies, and contracts shall be submitted for approval to the
commissioner, and the rates of any plan offered under this section shall be
reasonable in relation to the benefits thereto.

(3) Premium rates for
health benefit plans for small employers as defined in this section shall be
subject to the following provisions:

(a) The health
maintenance organization shall develop its rates based on an adjusted community
rate and may only vary the adjusted community rate for:

(i) Geographic area;

(ii) Family size;

(iii) Age; and

(iv) Wellness
activities.

(b) The adjustment for
age in (a)(iii) of this subsection may not use age brackets smaller than
five-year increments, which shall begin with age twenty and end with age
sixty-five. Employees under the age of twenty shall be treated as those age
twenty.

(c) The health
maintenance organization shall be permitted to develop separate rates for
individuals age sixty-five or older for coverage for which medicare is the
primary payer and coverage for which medicare is not the primary payer. Both
rates shall be subject to the requirements of this subsection (3).

(d) The permitted rates
for any age group shall be no more than four hundred twenty-five percent of the
lowest rate for all age groups on January 1, 1996, four hundred percent on
January 1, 1997, and three hundred seventy-five percent on January 1, 2000, and
thereafter.

(e) A discount for
wellness activities shall be permitted to reflect actuarially justified
differences in utilization or cost attributed to such programs not to exceed
twenty percent.

(f) The rate charged
for a health benefit plan offered under this section may not be adjusted more
frequently than annually except that the premium may be changed to reflect:

(i) Changes to the
enrollment of the small employer;

(ii) Changes to the
family composition of the employee;

(iii) Changes to the
health benefit plan requested by the small employer; or

(iv) Changes in
government requirements affecting the health benefit plan.

(g) Rating factors
shall produce premiums for identical groups that differ only by the amounts
attributable to plan design, with the exception of discounts for health
improvement programs.

(h) For the purposes of
this section, a health benefit plan that contains a restricted network
provision shall not be considered similar coverage to a health benefit plan
that does not contain such a provision, provided that the restrictions of benefits
to network providers result in substantial differences in claims costs. This
subsection does not restrict or enhance the portability of benefits as provided
in RCW 48.43.015.

(i) Adjusted community
rates established under this section shall pool the medical experience of all
groups purchasing coverage.

(4) ((The health
benefit plans authorized by this section that are lower than the required
offering shall not supplant or supersede any existing policy for the benefit of
employees in this state.))

Nothing in this section
shall restrict the right of employees to collectively bargain for insurance
providing benefits in excess of those provided herein.

(5)(a) Except as
provided in this subsection, requirements used by a health maintenance
organization in determining whether to provide coverage to a small employer
shall be applied uniformly among all small employers applying for coverage or
receiving coverage from the carrier.

(b) A health
maintenance organization shall not require a minimum participation level
greater than:

(i) One hundred percent
of eligible employees working for groups with three or less employees; and

(ii) Seventy-five
percent of eligible employees working for groups with more than three
employees.

(c) In applying minimum
participation requirements with respect to a small employer, a small employer
shall not consider employees or dependents who have similar existing coverage
in determining whether the applicable percentage of participation is met.

(d) A health
maintenance organization may not increase any requirement for minimum employee
participation or modify any requirement for minimum employer contribution
applicable to a small employer at any time after the small employer has been
accepted for coverage.

(6) A
health maintenance organization must offer coverage to all eligible employees
of a small employer and their dependents. A health maintenance organization
may not offer coverage to only certain individuals or dependents in a small
employer group or to only part of the group. A health maintenance organization
may not modify a health plan with respect to a small employer or any eligible
employee or dependent, through riders, endorsements or otherwise, to restrict
or exclude coverage or benefits for specific diseases, medical conditions, or
services otherwise covered by the plan.

---
END ---