BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF
WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1. RCW 82.24.010 and 1997 c
420 s 3 are each amended to read as follows:

Unless the context
clearly requires otherwise, the definitions in this section apply throughout
this chapter:

(1) "Board"
means the liquor control board.

(2)
"Cigarette" means any roll for smoking made wholly or in part of
tobacco, irrespective of size or shape and irrespective of the tobacco being
flavored, adulterated, or mixed with any other ingredient, where such roll has
a wrapper or cover made of paper or any material, except where such wrapper is
wholly or in the greater part made of natural leaf tobacco in its natural
state. As used in this chapter, "cigarette" includes herbal
cigarettes.

(3) "Herbal
cigarette" means any roll for smoking made without use of tobacco or
controlled substances and with any other combination of organic matter that
reasonably mimics tobacco cigarettes in their use or appearance.

(4) "Indian
tribal organization" means a federally recognized Indian tribe, or tribal
entity, and includes an Indian wholesaler or retailer that is owned by an
Indian who is an enrolled tribal member conducting business under tribal
license or similar tribal approval within Indian country. For purposes of this
chapter "Indian country" is defined in the manner set forth in 18
U.S.C. Sec. 1151.

(((4))) (5)
"Precollection obligation" means the obligation of a seller otherwise
exempt from the tax imposed by this chapter to collect the tax from that
seller's buyer.

(((5))) (6)
"Retailer" means every person, other than a wholesaler, who
purchases, sells, offers for sale or distributes any one or more of the
articles taxed ((herein)) under this chapter, irrespective of
quantity or amount, or the number of sales, and all persons operating under a
retailer's registration certificate.

(((6))) (7)
"Retail selling price" means the ordinary, customary or usual price
paid by the consumer for each package of cigarettes, less the tax levied by
this chapter and less any similar tax levied by this state.

(((7))) (8)
"Stamp" means the stamp or stamps by use of which the tax levy under
this chapter is paid or identification is made of those cigarettes with respect
to which no tax is imposed.

(((8))) (9)
"Wholesaler" means every person who purchases, sells, or distributes
any one or more of the articles taxed herein to retailers for the purpose of
resale only.

(((9))) (10)
The meaning attributed, in chapter 82.04 RCW, to the words "person,"
"sale," "business" and "successor" applies
equally in this chapter.

Sec. 2. RCW 26.28.080 and 1994
sp.s. c 7 s 437 are each amended to read as follows:

Every person who sells
or gives, or permits to be sold or given to any person under the age of
eighteen years any cigar, cigarette, cigarette paper or wrapper, herbal
cigarette, or tobacco in any form is guilty of a gross misdemeanor.

It shall be no defense
to a prosecution for a violation of this section that the person acted, or was
believed by the defendant to act, as agent or representative of another.

Sec. 3. RCW 70.155.010 and 1993
c 507 s 2 are each amended to read as follows:

The definitions set
forth in RCW 82.24.010 shall apply to RCW 70.155.020 through 70.155.130. In
addition, for the purposes of this chapter, unless otherwise required by the
context:

(1) "Board"
means the Washington state liquor control board.

(2) "Herbal
cigarette" means any roll for smoking made without use of tobacco or
controlled substances and with any other combination of organic matter that
reasonably mimics tobacco cigarettes in their use or appearance.

(3)
"Minor" refers to an individual who is less than eighteen years old.

(((3))) (4)
"Public place" means a public street, sidewalk, or park, or any area
open to the public in a publicly owned and operated building.

(((4))) (5)
"Sample" means a tobacco product distributed to members of the
general public at no cost or at nominal cost for product promotion purposes.

(((5))) (6)
"Sampler" means a person engaged in the business of sampling other
than a retailer.

(((6))) (7)
"Sampling" means the distribution of samples to members of the
general public in a public place.

(((7)))
(8) "Tobacco product" means a product that contains tobacco
and is intended for human consumption. For the purposes of this chapter,
"tobacco product" also includes herbal cigarettes.

---
END ---