BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF
WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1. RCW 50.29.025 and 2000 c
2 s 4 are each amended to read as follows:

The contribution rate
for each employer subject to contributions under RCW 50.24.010 shall be
determined under this section.

(1) A fund balance
ratio shall be determined by dividing the balance in the unemployment
compensation fund as of the September 30th immediately preceding the rate year
by the total remuneration paid by all employers subject to contributions during
the second calendar year preceding the rate year and reported to the department
by the following March 31st. The division shall be carried to the fourth
decimal place with the remaining fraction, if any, disregarded. The fund
balance ratio shall be expressed as a percentage.

(2) The interval of the
fund balance ratio, expressed as a percentage, shall determine which tax
schedule in subsection (5) of this section shall be in effect for assigning tax
rates for the rate year. The intervals for determining the effective tax
schedule shall be:

Interval
of the

Fund
Balance Ratio Effective

Expressed
as a Percentage Tax Schedule

2.90
and above AA

2.10 to 2.89 A

1.70 to 2.09 B

1.40 to 1.69 C

1.00
to 1.39 D

0.70
to 0.99 E

Less than 0.70 F

(3) An array shall be
prepared, listing all qualified employers in ascending order of their benefit
ratios. The array shall show for each qualified employer: (a) Identification
number; (b) benefit ratio; (c) taxable payrolls for the four calendar quarters
immediately preceding the computation date and reported to the department by
the cut-off date; (d) a cumulative total of taxable payrolls consisting of the
employer's taxable payroll plus the taxable payrolls of all other employers
preceding him or her in the array; and (e) the percentage equivalent of the
cumulative total of taxable payrolls.

(4) Each employer in
the array shall be assigned to one of twenty rate classes according to the
percentage intervals of cumulative taxable payrolls set forth in subsection (5)
of this section: PROVIDED, That if an employer's taxable payroll falls within
two or more rate classes, the employer and any other employer with the same
benefit ratio shall be assigned to the lowest rate class which includes any
portion of the employer's taxable payroll.

(5) Except as provided
in RCW 50.29.026, the contribution rate for each employer in the array shall be
the rate specified in the following tables for the rate class to which he or
she has been assigned, as determined under subsection (4) of this section, within
the tax schedule which is to be in effect during the rate year:

Percent of

Cumulative Schedules of Contributions
Rates

Taxable Payrolls for Effective Tax Schedule

Rate

From To Class AA A B C D E F

0.00 5.00 1 0.47 0.47 0.57 0.97 1.47 1.87 2.47

5.01 10.00 2 0.47 0.47 0.77 1.17 1.67 2.07 2.67

10.01 15.00 3 0.57 0.57 0.97 1.37 1.77 2.27 2.87

15.01 20.00 4 0.57 0.73 1.11 1.51 1.90 2.40 2.98

20.01 25.00 5 0.72 0.92 1.30 1.70 2.09 2.59 3.08

25.01 30.00 6 0.91 1.11 1.49 1.89 2.29 2.69 3.18

30.01 35.00 7 1.00 1.29 1.69 2.08 2.48 2.88 3.27

35.01 40.00 8 1.19 1.48 1.88 2.27 2.67 3.07 3.47

40.01 45.00 9 1.37 1.67 2.07 2.47 2.87 3.27 3.66

45.01 50.00 10 1.56 1.86 2.26 2.66 3.06 3.46 3.86

50.01 55.00 11 1.84 2.14 2.45 2.85 3.25 3.66 3.95

55.01 60.00 12 2.03 2.33 2.64 3.04 3.44 3.85 4.15

60.01 65.00 13 2.22 2.52 2.83 3.23 3.64 4.04 4.34

65.01 70.00 14 2.40 2.71 3.02 3.43 3.83 4.24 4.54

70.01 75.00 15 2.68 2.90 3.21 3.62 4.02 4.43 4.63

75.01 80.00 16 2.87 3.09 3.69 3.81 4.22 4.53 4.73

80.01 85.00 17 3.27 3.47 3.77 4.17 4.57 4.87 4.97

85.01 90.00 18 3.67 3.87 4.17 4.57 4.87 4.97 5.17

90.01 95.00 19 4.07 4.27 4.57 4.97 5.07 5.17 5.37

95.01 100.00 20 5.40 5.40 5.40 5.40 5.40 5.40 5.40

(6) The contribution
rate for each employer not qualified to be in the array shall be as follows:

(a) Employers who do
not meet the definition of "qualified employer" by reason of failure
to pay contributions when due shall be assigned a contribution rate two-tenths
higher than that in rate class 20 for the applicable rate year, except
employers who have an approved agency-deferred payment contract by September 30
of the previous rate year. If any employer with an approved agency-deferred
payment contract fails to make any one of the succeeding deferred payments or
fails to submit any succeeding tax report and payment in a timely manner, the
employer's tax rate shall immediately revert to a contribution rate two-tenths
higher than that in rate class 20 for the applicable rate year; and

(b) For all other
employers not qualified to be in the array, the contribution rate shall be a
rate equal to the average industry rate as determined by the commissioner plus
twenty-five percent; however, the rate may not be less than one percent or
more than the rate in rate class 20 for the applicable rate year.
Assignment of employers by the commissioner to industrial classification, for
purposes of this section, shall be in accordance with established
classification practices found in the "Standard Industrial Classification
Manual" issued by the federal office of management and budget to the third
digit provided in the standard industrial classification code, or in the North
American industry classification system code.

Sec. 2. RCW 50.29.062 and 1996 c
238 s 1 are each amended to read as follows:

Predecessor and
successor employer contribution rates shall be computed in the following
manner:

(1) If the successor is
an employer, as defined in RCW 50.04.080, at the time of the transfer, its
contribution rate shall remain unchanged for the remainder of the rate year in
which the transfer occurs. From and after January 1 following the transfer,
the successor's contribution rate for each rate year shall be based on its
experience with payrolls and benefits including the experience of the acquired
business or portion of a business from the date of transfer, as of the regular
computation date for that rate year.

(2) If the successor is
not an employer at the time of the transfer, it shall pay contributions at the
lowest rate determined under either of the following:

(a)(i) For transfers
before January 1, 1997, the contribution rate of the rate class assigned to the
predecessor employer at the time of the transfer for the remainder of that rate
year and continuing until the successor qualifies for a different rate in its
own right;

(ii) For transfers on
or after January 1, 1997, the contribution rate of the rate class assigned to
the predecessor employer at the time of the transfer for the remainder of that
rate year. Any experience relating to the assignment of that rate class
attributable to the predecessor is transferred to the successor. Beginning
with the January 1 following the transfer, the successor's contribution rate
shall be based on the transferred experience of the acquired business and the
successor's experience after the transfer; or

(b) The contribution
rate equal to the average industry rate as determined by the commissioner plus
twenty-five percent, but not less than one percent or more than the rate
in rate class 20 for the applicable rate year, and continuing until the
successor qualifies for a different rate in its own right. Assignment of
employers by the commissioner to industrial classification, for purposes of
this subsection, must be in accordance with established classification
practices found in the "Standard Industrial Classification Manual"
issued by the federal office of management and budget to the third digit
provided in the standard industrial classification code.

(3) If the successor is
not an employer at the time of the transfer and simultaneously acquires the
business or a portion of the business of two or more employers in different
rate classes, its rate from the date the transfer occurred until the end of
that rate year and until it qualifies in its own right for a new rate, shall be
the highest rate class applicable at the time of the acquisition to any
predecessor employer who is a party to the acquisition, but not less than one
percent.

(4) The contribution
rate on any payroll retained by a predecessor employer shall remain unchanged
for the remainder of the rate year in which the transfer occurs.

(5) In all cases, from
and after January 1 following the transfer, the predecessor's contribution rate
for each rate year shall be based on its experience with payrolls and benefits
as of the regular computation date for that rate year including the experience
of the acquired business or portion of business up to the date of transfer:
PROVIDED, That if all of the predecessor's business is transferred to a
successor or successors, the predecessor shall not be a qualified employer
until it satisfies the requirements of a "qualified employer" as set
forth in RCW 50.29.010.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
3. If any part of this act
is found to be in conflict with federal requirements that are a prescribed
condition to the allocation of federal funds to the state or the eligibility of
employers in this state for federal unemployment tax credits, the conflicting
part of this act is inoperative solely to the extent of the conflict, and the
finding or determination does not affect the operation of the remainder of this
act. Rules adopted under this act must meet federal requirements that are a
necessary condition to the receipt of federal funds by the state or the
granting of federal unemployment tax credits to employers in this state.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 4. This act applies
beginning with rate years that begin on or after January 1, 2002.

---
END ---