BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF
WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec.
1. (1) The legislature finds
that the current method for determining water-dependent rental rates for
aquatic land leases for marinas may not be achieving the management goals in
RCW 79.90.450 through 79.90.540. The current method for setting rental rates for
marinas, as well as alternatives to the current methods, should be evaluated in
light of achieving management goals for aquatic lands leases. The legislature
finds that in order to prepare a complete and comprehensive report on this
subject, the department of natural resources must be provided with complete
income and expense information. The legislature further finds that rent
increases for marinas should be limited to twenty-five percent of what the
increase for each marina would otherwise have been under RCW 79.90.480, until
June 30, 2002.

(2) The department of
natural resources shall study and prepare a report to the legislature on
alternatives to the current method for determination of water-dependent rent
for marina lessees, as set forth in RCW 79.90.480. The only methods to be
studied are: The current water-dependent method; an appraisal/fair market
value method; a method using the existing water-dependent formula but
substituting an average of upland values in place of a single adjacent or proximate
upland value; a revenue model based upon total gross business income as
reported to the department of revenue; and a Northwest marine trade association
proposed revenue model based only on theoretical moorage income generated on
state-owned aquatic land. Discussions and work on the report are limited to
the study alternatives listed in this subsection, and information from the 1998
study.

(3) The report shall be
prepared with the assistance of appropriate economic expertise, and with marina
owner and other stakeholder involvement. Affected marina owners and
stakeholders shall participate with the department of natural resources by
providing information necessary to complete this study. This information shall
include gross income and expenses from each marina with details on the sources
of income and cause of expense. For each method, the report shall:

(a) Describe each
method and the costs and benefits of each;

(b) Compare each with
the current method of calculating rents;

(c) Provide the private
industry perspective;

(d) Describe the public
perspective;

(e) Analyze the impact
on state lease revenue;

(f) Evaluate the
impacts of water-dependent rates on economic development in economically
distressed counties;

(g) Evaluate the
liabilities associated with marinas; and

(h) Evaluate the ease
and cost of administration.

(4) The report shall be
presented to the legislature by September 1, 2001, with the recommendations of
the department of natural resources clearly identified. The department's recommendations
must include draft legislation as necessary for implementation of its
recommendations.

(5) In order to
facilitate the participation of affected stakeholders in the preparation of the
report to the legislature, the department of natural resources shall form a
marina rent committee. The committee consists of one representative with
knowledge of waterfront industries and economic principles from each of the
following groups: The Northwest marine trade association; the association of
independent moorages; the Puget Sound marina association; an independent marina
operator from a rural area selected by the department of natural resources; the
association of Washington cities; the Washington public ports association; the
association of Washington counties; a member of the public who will represent
the objectives in RCW 79.90.455 (1), (3), and (4) and who is selected by the
department of natural resources; and the aquatic resources division of the
department of natural resources. The committee will assist the staff and
consultants of the department of natural resources to assemble and evaluate
relevant data, develop alternatives, and draft the report.

Sec. 2. RCW 79.90.480 and 1998 c
185 s 2 are each amended to read as follows:

Except as otherwise
provided by this chapter, annual rent rates for the lease of state-owned
aquatic lands for water-dependent uses shall be determined as follows:

(1)(a) The assessed
land value, exclusive of improvements, as determined by the county assessor, of
the upland tax parcel used in conjunction with the leased area or, if there are
no such uplands, of the nearest upland tax parcel used for water-dependent
purposes divided by the parcel area equals the upland value.

(b) The upland value
times the area of leased aquatic lands times thirty percent equals the aquatic
land value.

(2) As of July 1, 1989,
and each July 1st thereafter, the department shall determine the real
capitalization rate to be applied to water-dependent aquatic land leases
commencing or being adjusted under subsection (3)(a) of this section in that
fiscal year. The real capitalization rate shall be the real rate of return,
except that until June 30, 1989, the real capitalization rate shall be five
percent and thereafter it shall not change by more than one percentage point in
any one year or be more than seven percent or less than three percent.

(3) The annual rent
shall be:

(a) Determined
initially, and redetermined every four years or as otherwise provided in the lease,
by multiplying the aquatic land value times the real capitalization rate; and

(b) Adjusted by the
inflation rate each year in which the rent is not determined under subsection
(3)(a) of this section.

(4) If the upland
parcel used in conjunction with the leased area is not assessed or has an
assessed value inconsistent with the purposes of the lease, the nearest
comparable upland parcel used for similar purposes shall be substituted and the
lease payment determined in the same manner as provided in this section.

(5) For the purposes of
this section, "upland tax parcel" is a tax parcel, some portion of
which has upland characteristics. Filled tidelands or shorelands with upland
characteristics which abut state-owned aquatic land shall be considered as
uplands in determining aquatic land values.

(6) The annual rent for
filled state-owned aquatic lands that have the characteristics of uplands shall
be determined in accordance with RCW 79.90.500 in those cases in which the
state owns the fill and has a right to charge for the fill.

(7) ((For leases for
marina uses only, beginning on June 11, 1998, the annual rental rates in effect
on December 31, 1997, shall remain in effect until July 1, 1999, at which time
the annual water-dependent rent shall be determined by the method in effect at
that time. In order to be eligible for the rate to remain at this level, a
marina lease must be in good standing, meaning that the lessee must be current
with payment of rent, the lease not expired or in approved holdover status, and
the lessee not in breach of other terms of the agreement.

(8) For all new
leases for marinas, or any other water-dependent use, issued after December 31,
1997, the initial annual water-dependent rent shall be determined by the
methods in subsections (1) through (6) of this section)) For leases for marina uses only, beginning
January 1, 2001, and effective through June 30, 2002, increases to the annual
rental rates in effect on January 1, 2001, resulting from redetermination or
adjustment under subsection (3) of this section are limited to twenty-five
percent of the increase otherwise calculated under subsection (3) of this
section. In order to be eligible for the limitation on rental increases, a
marina lease must be in good standing, meaning that the lessee must be current
with payment of rent, the lease not be expired unless it is in holdover status,
the lessee not be in breach of other terms of the agreement, and the lessee
must be willing to provide the department of natural resources with income and
cost data suitable for appraisal. Beginning July 2002, until the next
redetermination or adjustment of rent for each lease under subsection (3) of
this section, annual rental rates for marina uses will be the full amount that
they would have been for each marina had the limitation on rental increases
never applied. The limitation on rental increases does not apply to the
initial rent determination for a new marina lease nor to increases resulting
from any change in a lease not related to subsection (3) of this section.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 3. If specific funding for
the purposes of this act, referencing this act by bill or chapter number, is
not provided by June 30, 2001, in the omnibus appropriations act, this act is
null and void.

---
END ---