BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF
WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec.
1. A new section is added
to chapter 82.04 RCW to read as follows:

A credit is allowed
against the tax due under this chapter to an employer who must comply with the
ergonomics rule promulgated by the department of labor and industries and
adopted on May 26, 2000 (WAC 296-62-051). The credit is equal to the direct
expenditures incurred by the employer to comply with the ergonomics rule,
including expenditures for employee ergonomics awareness education,
expenditures to analyze jobs to identify those with work-related causes of
musculoskeletal disorders, and expenditures made to reduce hazards related to
work-related causes of musculoskeletal disorders as required by the rule.
Credit under this section is limited to the amount of tax imposed under this chapter.
Refunds shall not be given in place of credits. Unused credits may be carried
over to subsequent reporting periods. No credit may be taken for expenditures
made after July 1, 2007.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 2. This act takes effect
August 1, 2001.

---
END ---