BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF
WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1. RCW 82.46.070 and 1990
1st ex.s. c 5 s 3 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) Subject to
subsection (2) of this section, the legislative authority of any county may
impose an additional excise tax on each sale of real property in the county at
a rate not to exceed one percent of the selling price. The proceeds of the tax
shall be used exclusively for the acquisition and maintenance of conservation
areas, development of affordable housing including acquisition, building,
rehabilitation, and maintenance and operation of housing for very low, low, and
moderate income persons and those with special needs, and public works projects
specified in RCW 82.46.035(5).

The taxes imposed under
this subsection shall be imposed in the same manner and on the same
occurrences, and are subject to the same conditions, as the taxes under chapter
82.45 RCW, except:

(a) The tax shall be
the obligation of the purchaser; and

(b) The tax does not
apply to the acquisition of conservation areas by the county.

The county may enforce
the obligation through an action of debt against the purchaser or may foreclose
the lien on the property in the same manner prescribed for the foreclosure of
mortgages.

The tax shall take
effect thirty days after the election at which the taxes are authorized.

(2) No tax may be
imposed under subsection (1) of this section unless approved by a majority of
the voters of the county voting thereon for a specified period and maximum rate
after:

(a) The adoption of a
resolution by the county legislative authority of the county proposing this
action; or

(b) The filing of a
petition proposing this action with the county auditor, which petition is
signed by county voters at least equal in number to ten percent of the total
number of voters in the county who voted at the last preceding general
election.

The ballot proposition
shall be submitted to the voters of the county at the next general election
occurring at least sixty days after a petition is filed, or at any special
election prior to this general election that has been called for such purpose
by the county legislative authority.

(3) A plan for the
expenditure of the excise tax proceeds shall be prepared by the county
legislative authority at least sixty days before the election if the proposal
is initiated by resolution of the county legislative authority, or within six
months after the tax has been authorized by the voters if the proposal is
initiated by petition. Prior to the adoption of this plan, the elected
officials of cities located within the county shall be consulted and a public
hearing shall be held to obtain public input. The proceeds of this excise tax
must be expended in conformance with this plan.

(4) As
used in this section, "conservation area" has the meaning given under
RCW 36.32.570.

--- END ---