BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF
WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1. RCW 72.05.020 and 1998 c
269 s 2 are each amended to read as follows:

As used in this
chapter, unless the context requires otherwise:

(1) "Community
facility" means a group care facility operated for the care of juveniles
committed to the department under RCW 13.40.185. A county detention facility
that houses juveniles committed to the department under RCW 13.40.185 pursuant
to a contract with the department is not a community facility.

(2)
"Department" means the department of social and health services.

(3) "Equitable
distribution" or "distribute equitably" means siting or locating
community facilities in a manner that reasonably reflects the proportion of
juveniles sentenced to the department from each county or rural multicounty
geographic area designated by the department, and, to the extent practicable,
the proportion of such juveniles residing in particular jurisdictions or
communities within such counties or geographic areas. Equitable distribution
is a policy goal, not a basis for any legal challenge to the siting,
construction, occupancy, or operation of any facility anywhere in the state.

(4)
"Juvenile" means a person under the age of twenty-one who has been
sentenced to a term of confinement under the supervision of the department
under RCW 13.40.185.

(((4))) (5)
"Service provider" means the entity that operates a community
facility.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
2. A new section is added
to chapter 72.05 RCW to read as follows:

(1) The department
shall prepare a projected list of counties and rural multicounty geographic
areas in which community facilities need to be sited over the biennium
beginning July 1, 2003, and every biennium thereafter, and transmit the list to
the office of financial management and the counties on the list. The list may
be updated as needed. In preparing the list, the department shall make
substantial efforts to provide for the equitable distribution of community
facilities among counties. The department shall give great weight to the
following factors in determining equitable distribution:

(a) The locations of
existing community facilities owned or operated by, or operated under contract
with, the department in each county; and

(b) The number and
proportion of juvenile offenders committed to the department residing in the
county or rural multicounty geographic area.

(2)(a) In preparing the
list required under subsection (1) of this section, the department shall:

(i) Give great weight
to the factors identified in subsection (1) of this section;

(ii) Use the
information contained in the most recent edition of the report required under
subsection (4) of this section; and

(iii) Use the criteria
adopted under subsection (7) of this section.

(b) Prior to finalizing
the list of projected community facilities required under subsection (1) of
this section, the department shall consult with the county legislative
authorities of each county identified on the list. The department shall also
hold at least one public hearing within each such county or rural multicounty
geographic area, including, if known, the affected part of the county.

(3) The department
shall submit, along with the list required under subsection (1) of this
section, the operational requirements for the facilities on the list to the
office of financial management and the counties on the list.

(4) To carry out the
purposes of subsection (1) of this section, the department shall, no later than
July 1, 2003, develop a map of the state that identifies the locations of
existing facilities and the counties or rural multicounty geographic areas
needing projected facilities identified in subsection (1) of this section
during the biennium. The department shall update the map at least once per
biennium. The department shall also maintain data on the number and proportion
of juvenile offenders identified in subsection (1)(b) of this section and shall
biennially publish a report including the most recent version of the map and
offender data for the counties and rural multicounty geographic areas.

(5) A county, and any
county designated by the department within a rural multicounty geographic area,
that is included on the list required under subsection (1) of this section
planning under RCW 36.70A.040 shall adopt development regulations that
designate areas or zones that allow the siting of each projected community
facility on the list within the county using its process for siting essential
public facilities under RCW 36.70A.200 and section 8 of this act.

(6) A county, and any
county designated by the department within a rural multicounty geographic area,
that is included on the list required under subsection (1) of this section not
planning under RCW 36.70A.040 shall adopt development regulations that
designate areas or zones that allow the siting of each projected community
facility on the list within the county using the procedures established in
section 9 of this act.

(7) The department
shall, by rule, adopt facility criteria and shall consult with local
governments in such rule making.

Sec. 3. RCW 72.05.400 and 1998 c
269 s 5 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) Whenever the
department operates, or the secretary enters a contract to operate, a community
facility, the community facility may be operated only after the public
notification and opportunities for review and comment as required by this
section.

(2) The secretary shall
establish a process for early and continuous public participation in
establishing or relocating community facilities. The process shall include, at
a minimum, public meetings in the local communities affected, as well as
opportunities for written and oral comments, in the following manner:

(a) If there are more
than three sites initially selected as potential locations and the selection
process by the secretary or a service provider reduces the number of possible
sites for a community facility to no fewer than three, the secretary or the
chief operating officer of the service provider shall notify the public of the
possible siting and hold at least two public hearings in each community where a
community facility may be sited at least forty-five days before a final
selection is made.

(b) When the secretary
or service provider has determined the community facility's location, the
secretary or the chief operating officer of the service provider shall hold at
least one additional public hearing in the community where the community facility
will be sited.

(c) When the secretary
has entered negotiations with a service provider and only one site is under
consideration, then at least two public hearings shall be held.

(d) To provide adequate
notice of((,)) and opportunity for interested persons to comment on((,))
a proposed location, the secretary or the chief operating officer of the
service provider shall make a good faith effort to provide at least
fourteen days' advance notice of the ((meeting to)) public hearings
to at least the following:

(i) The appropriate
legislative authorities of the affected counties, cities, and towns;

(ii) Local
government planning agencies in the affected communities;

(iii) All
newspapers of general circulation in the ((community,)) local area
and all radio stations and television stations generally available
to persons in the community((,)) where the potential site is located;

(iv) Any school
district, private school, or kindergarten in which the community
facility would be sited or whose boundary is within two miles of a proposed
community facility, any institution of higher education, any library
district ((in which the community facility would be sited, local business or
fraternal organizations that request notification from the secretary or agency,
and any person or property owner within a one-half mile radius of the proposed
community facility)), and all other local government offices within a
one-half mile radius of the proposed site or sites;

(v) The local
chamber of commerce, local economic development agencies, and any other local
organizations that request such notification from the department; and

(vi) Written
notification to all residents and property owners within a one-half mile radius
of the proposed site or sites.

(3) The notice
required under subsection (2) of this section must also inform the public that
any interested person or entity, including a local government entity, is
invited to submit written comments regarding a proposed location, including comments
regarding whether the site meets the equitable distribution and other statutory
requirements for the facility. Written comments must be submitted not later
than thirty days following the date notice is issued pursuant to subsection (2)
of this section.

(4) The department
must consider the testimony received at the public hearings and any written
comments submitted before making a final selection of the site for the location
or relocation of a community facility. The department shall issue a written
analysis of the final selection, including how the selection was consistent
with the requirements of section 2 of this act.

(5) Before
initiating ((this)) the process in subsection (2) of this
section, the department shall contact local government planning agencies in
the communities containing the proposed community facility. The department
shall coordinate with local government agencies to ensure that opportunities
are provided for effective citizen input and to reduce the duplication of
notice and meetings.

(((3))) (6)
The secretary shall not issue a license to any service provider until the
service provider submits proof that the requirements of this section have been
met.

(((4))) (7)
If local government land use regulations require that a special use or
conditional use permit be submitted and approved before a community facility
can be sited, and the process for obtaining the permit includes public notice
and hearing requirements similar to those required under this section, the
requirements of this section shall not apply to the extent they would duplicate
requirements under the local land use regulations.

(8) This section
shall apply only to community facilities sited after September 1, 1998.

Sec. 4. RCW 72.65.010 and 1992 c
7 s 56 are each amended to read as follows:

As used in this
chapter, the following terms shall have the following meanings:

(1)
"Department" ((shall)) means the department of
corrections.

(2) "Equitable
distribution" or "distribute equitably" means siting or locating
work release facilities in a manner that reasonably reflects the proportion of
offenders sentenced to the custody or supervision of the department by the
courts of each county or rural multicounty geographic area designated by the
department, and, to the extent practicable, the proportion of such offenders
residing in particular jurisdictions or communities within such counties or
rural multicounty geographic areas. Equitable distribution is a policy goal,
not a basis for any legal challenge to the siting, construction, occupancy, or
operation of any facility anywhere in the state.

(3)
"Prisoner" means a person either male or female, convicted of a
felony and sentenced by the superior court to a term of confinement and
treatment in a state correctional institution under the jurisdiction of the
department.

(4)
"Secretary" ((shall)) means the secretary of
corrections.

(((3))) (5)
"State correctional institutions" shall mean and include all state
adult correctional facilities established pursuant to law under the
jurisdiction of the department for the treatment of convicted felons sentenced
to a term of confinement.

(((4)
"Prisoner" shall mean a person either male or female, convicted of a
felony and sentenced by the superior court to a term of confinement and
treatment in a state correctional institution under the jurisdiction of the department.

(5))) (6) "Superintendent" ((shall))
means the superintendent of a state correctional institution, camp or
other facility now or hereafter established under the jurisdiction of the
department pursuant to law.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
5. A new section is added
to chapter 72.65 RCW to read as follows:

(1) The department
shall prepare a projected list of counties and rural multicounty geographic
areas in which work release facilities need to be sited over the biennium
beginning July 1, 2003, and every biennium thereafter, and transmit the list to
the office of financial management and the counties on the list. The list may
be updated as needed. In preparing the list, the department shall make
substantial efforts to provide for the equitable distribution of work release
facilities among counties. The department shall give great weight to the
following factors in determining equitable distribution:

(a) The locations of
existing residential facilities owned or operated by, or operated under
contract with, the department in each county; and

(b) The number and
proportion of adult offenders sentenced to the custody or supervision of the
department by the courts of the county or rural multicounty geographic area.

(2)(a) In preparing the
list required under subsection (1) of this section, the department shall:

(i) Give great weight
to the factors identified in subsection (1) of this section;

(ii) Use the
information contained in the most recent edition of the report required under
subsection (4) of this section; and

(iii) Use the criteria
adopted under subsection (7) of this section.

(b) Prior to finalizing
the list of projected work release facilities required under subsection (1) of
this section, the department shall consult with the county legislative
authorities of each county identified on the list. The department also shall
hold at least one public hearing within each such county or rural multicounty
geographic area, including, if known, the affected part of the county or rural
multicounty geographic area.

(3) The department
shall submit, along with the list required under subsection (1) of this
section, the operational requirements for the facilities on the list to the
office of financial management and the counties on the list.

(4) To carry out the
purposes of subsection (1) of this section, the department shall, no later than
July 1, 2003, develop a map of the state that identifies the locations of
existing facilities and the counties or rural multicounty geographic areas
needing projected facilities identified in subsection (1) of this section during
the biennium. The department shall update the map at least once per biennium.
The department shall also maintain data on the number and proportion of
offenders identified in subsection (1)(b) of this section and shall biennially
publish a report including the most recent version of the map and offender data
for the counties and rural multicounty geographic areas.

(5) A county, and any
county designated by the department within a rural multicounty geographic area,
that is included on the list required under subsection (1) of this section
planning under RCW 36.70A.040 shall adopt development regulations that
designate areas or zones that allow the siting of each projected work release
facility on the list within the county using its process for siting essential
public facilities under RCW 36.70A.200 and section 8 of this act.

(6) A county, and any
county designated by the department within a rural multicounty geographic area,
that is included on the list required under subsection (1) of this section not
planning under RCW 36.70A.040 shall adopt development regulations that
designate areas or zones that allow the siting of each projected work release
facility on the list within the county using the procedures established in
section 9 of this act.

(7) The department
shall, by rule, adopt facility criteria and shall consult with local
governments in such rule making.

Sec. 6. RCW 72.65.220 and 1997 c
348 s 1 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) The department or a
private or public entity under contract with the department may establish or
relocate for the operation of a work release or other community-based facility
only after ((public notifications and local public meetings have been completed
consistent with)) meeting the requirements of this section.

(2) The department and
other state agencies responsible for siting department-owned, operated, or
contracted facilities shall establish a process for early and continuous public
participation in establishing or relocating work release or other
community-based facilities. This process shall include public meetings in the
local communities affected, opportunities for written and oral comments, and
wide dissemination of proposals and alternatives, including at least the
following:

(a) When the department
or a private or public entity under contract with the department has selected
three or fewer sites for final consideration of a department-owned, operated,
or contracted work release or other community-based facility, the department or
contracting organization shall make public notification and conduct at least
two public hearings in each of the local communities ((of the
final three or fewer proposed sites)) where such a facility may be sited
at least forty-five days before a final selection is made. An additional
public hearing after public notification shall also be conducted in the local
community selected as the final proposed site.

(b) ((Notifications
required under this section shall be provided to)) To provide adequate
notice of and opportunity for interested persons to comment on a proposed
location, the department or contracting entity shall make a good faith effort
to provide at least fourteen days' advance notice of the public hearings to at
least the following:

(i) The appropriate
legislative authorities of the affected counties, cities, and towns;

(ii) Local
government planning agencies in the affected communities;

(iii) All
newspapers of general circulation in the local area and all ((local))
radio stations((,)) and television stations((, and cable
networks)) generally available to persons in the community where the
potential site is located;

(((ii))) (iv)
Appropriate school districts, private schools, kindergartens, institutions
of higher education, city and county libraries, and all other local
government offices within a one-half mile radius of the proposed site or sites;

(((iii))) (v)
The local chamber of commerce, local economic development agencies, and any
other local organizations that request such notification from the department;
and

(((iv) In writing))
(vi) Written notification to all residents ((and/or)) and
property owners within a one-half mile radius of the proposed site or sites.

(3) The notice
required under subsection (2) of this section must also inform the public that
any interested person or entity, including a local government entity, is
invited to submit written comments regarding a proposed location, including
comments regarding whether the site meets the equitable distribution and other
statutory requirements for the facility. Written comments must be submitted
not later than thirty days following the date notice is issued pursuant to
subsection (2) of this section.

(4) The department
must consider the testimony received at the public hearings and any written
comments submitted before making a final selection of the site for the location
or relocation of a work release facility. The department shall issue a written
analysis of the final selection, including how the selection was consistent
with the requirements of section 5 of this act.

(5) When the
department contracts for the operation of a work release or other
community-based facility that is not owned or operated by the department, the
department shall require as part of its contract that the contracting entity
comply with all the public notification and public hearing requirements as
provided in this section for each located and relocated work release or other
community-based facility.

(6) If local
government regulations require that a special use or conditional use permit be
submitted and approved before a work release facility can be sited, and the
process for obtaining the permit includes public notice and hearing
requirements similar to those required under this section, the requirements of
this section shall not apply to the extent they would duplicate requirements
under the local land use regulations.

Sec. 7. RCW 36.70A.200 and 2001
2nd sp.s. c 12 s 205 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) The comprehensive
plan of each county and city that is planning under RCW 36.70A.040 shall
include a process for identifying and siting essential public facilities.
Essential public facilities include those facilities that are typically
difficult to site, such as airports, state education facilities and state or
regional transportation facilities as defined in RCW 47.06.140, state and local
correctional facilities, solid waste handling facilities, and in-patient
facilities including substance abuse facilities, mental health facilities,
group homes, and secure community transition facilities as defined in RCW
71.09.020.

(2) Each county and
city planning under RCW 36.70A.040 shall, not later than the deadline specified
in RCW 36.70A.130, establish a process, or amend its existing process, for
identifying and siting essential public facilities, and adopt or amend its
development regulations as necessary to provide for the siting of secure
community transition facilities consistent with statutory requirements
applicable to these facilities.

(3) Any city or county
not planning under RCW 36.70A.040 shall, not later than the deadline specified
in RCW 36.70A.130, establish a process for siting secure community transition
facilities and adopt or amend its development regulations as necessary to
provide for the siting of such facilities consistent with statutory
requirements applicable to these facilities.

(4) Each county
planning under RCW 36.70A.040, in cooperation with the cities located in whole
or in part within the county, and each city planning under RCW 36.70A.040
shall, when it next amends its comprehensive plan, but in no case later than
the deadline specified in RCW 36.70A.130, establish a process, or amend its
existing process, for identifying and siting essential public facilities, and
adopt or amend its development regulations as necessary to provide for the
siting of community facilities as defined in RCW 72.05.020 and work release and
other facilities operated by or under contract with the department of
corrections. When siting a community facility under chapter 72.05 RCW or a
work release facility under chapter 72.65 RCW, a county or city shall follow,
in addition to requirements of the process for siting essential public
facilities established under this section, the requirements established in
section 8 of this act.

(5) The office
of financial management shall maintain a list of those essential state public
facilities that are required or likely to be built within the next six years.
The office of financial management may at any time add facilities to the list.

(((5))) (6)
No local comprehensive plan or development regulation may preclude the siting
of essential public facilities.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
8. A new section is added
to chapter 36.70A RCW to read as follows:

(1) When providing for
the siting of an essential public facility that is a community facility under
chapter 72.05 RCW, a county or city planning under this chapter shall:

(a) Involve the
department of social and health services in the siting process;

(b) Make a substantial
effort to provide for the equitable distribution of community facilities by
giving great weight to the factors in section 2(1) (a) and (b) of this act; and

(c) Ensure that any
location identified is consistent with the operational requirements established
by the department of social and health services under section 2(3) of this act.

(2) When providing for
the siting of an essential public facility that is a work release facility
under chapter 72.65 RCW, a county or city planning under this chapter shall:

(a) Involve the
department of corrections in the siting process;

(b) Make a substantial
effort to provide for the equitable distribution of work release facilities by
giving great weight to the factors in section 5(1) (a) and (b) of this act; and

(c) Ensure that any
location identified is consistent with the operational requirements established
by the department of corrections under section 5(3) of this act.

(3)(a) As part of the
permitting process for a community facility under chapter 72.05 RCW, a county
or city may not impose upon the department of social and health services any
requirements beyond the operational requirements established under section 2(3)
of this act and the facility criteria established under section 2(7) of this
act.

(b) As part of the
permitting process for a work release facility under chapter 72.65 RCW, a
county or city may not impose upon the department of corrections any
requirements beyond the operational requirements established under section 5(3)
of this act and the facility criteria established under section 5(7) of this
act.

(4) Any conditional use
permit, special use permit, or any other development application process
necessary to site a community facility or work release facility may not exceed
one hundred twenty days and must include an appeal process.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
9. A new section is added
to chapter 36.70 RCW to read as follows:

(1) When providing for
the siting of a community facility under chapter 72.05 RCW, a county or city
planning under this chapter shall:

(a) Involve the
department of social and health services in the siting process;

(b) Make a substantial
effort to provide for the equitable distribution of community facilities by
giving great weight to the factors in section 2(1) (a) and (b) of this act; and

(c) Ensure that any
location identified is consistent with the operational requirements established
by the department of social and health services under section 2(3) of this act.

(2) When providing for
the siting of a work release facility under chapter 72.65 RCW, a county and
city planning under this chapter shall:

(a) Involve the
department of corrections in the siting process;

(b) Make a substantial
effort to provide for the equitable distribution of work release facilities by
giving great weight to the factors in section 5(1) (a) and (b) of this act; and

(c) Ensure that any
location identified is consistent with the operational requirements established
by the department of corrections under section 5(3) of this act.

(3)(a) As part of the
permitting process for a community facility under chapter 72.05 RCW, a county
or city may not impose upon the department of social and health services any
requirements beyond the operational requirements established under section 2(3)
of this act and the facility criteria established under section 2(7) of this act.

(b) As part of the
permitting process for a work release facility under chapter 72.65 RCW, a
county or city may not impose upon the department of corrections any
requirements beyond the operational requirements established under section 5(3)
of this act and the facility criteria established under section 5(7) of this
act.

(4) Any conditional use
permit, special use permit, or any other development application process
necessary to site a community facility or work release facility may not exceed
one hundred twenty days and must include an appeal process.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
10. If any provision of this
act or its application to any person or circumstance is held invalid, the
remainder of the act or the application of the provision to other persons or
circumstances is not affected.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 11. This act is necessary for
the immediate preservation of the public peace, health, or safety, or support
of the state government and its existing public institutions, and takes effect
immediately.

---
END ---