BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF
WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1. RCW 52.16.050 and 1998 c
5 s 1 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) Except as provided
in subsections (2) and (3) of this section, the county treasurer
((shall)) may pay out money received for the account of the
district on warrants issued by the county auditor against the proper funds of
the district. The warrants shall be issued on vouchers approved and signed by
a majority of the district board and by the district secretary.

(2) The board of fire
commissioners of a district that had an annual operating budget of five million
or more dollars in each of the preceding three years may by resolution adopt a
policy to issue its own warrants for payment of claims or other obligations of
the fire district. The board of fire commissioners, after auditing all
payrolls and bills, may authorize the issuing of one general certificate to the
county treasurer, to be signed by the chair of the board of fire commissioners,
authorizing the county treasurer to pay all the warrants specified by date,
number, name, and amount, and the accounting funds on which the warrants shall
be drawn; thereupon the district secretary may issue the warrants specified in
the general certificate.

(3) The board of
fire commissioners of a district that had an annual operating budget of under
five million dollars in each of the preceding three years may upon agreement
between the county treasurer and the fire district commission, with approval of
the fire district commission by resolution, adopt a policy to issue its own
warrants for payment of claims or other obligations of the fire district. The
board of fire commissioners, after auditing all payrolls and bills, may
authorize the issuing of one general certificate to the county treasurer, to be
signed by the chair of the board of fire commissioners, authorizing the county
treasurer to pay all the warrants specified by date, number, name, and amount,
and the accounting funds on which the warrants shall be drawn. The district
secretary may then issue the warrants specified in the general certificate.

(4)
The county treasurer may also pay general obligation bonds and the accrued
interest thereon in accordance with their terms from the general obligation
bond fund when interest or principal payments become due. The county treasurer
shall report in writing monthly to the secretary of the district the amount of
money held by the county in each fund and the amounts of receipts and
disbursements for each fund during the preceding month.

--- END ---