BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF
WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec.
1. A new section is added
to chapter 46.09 RCW to read as follows:

(1) The interagency
committee for outdoor recreation and the department shall jointly contract with
an independent entity to study the sources and make recommendations on the
distribution and use of funds provided to off-road vehicle and nonhighway road
recreational activities under RCW 46.09.170. The study must analyze and
determine the relative portion of the motor vehicle fuel tax revenues deposited
to the general fund under RCW 46.09.170 that are attributable to vehicles
operating off road or on nonhighway roads for recreational purposes as provided
in RCW 46.09.170. The study must include the types of vehicles and location of
their use, the types of recreational activities, and the types of recreational
facilities used.

(2) The interagency
committee for outdoor recreation and the department shall jointly review the
analysis and submit a report to the appropriate standing committees of the
legislature, including recommendations regarding amendments to RCW 46.09.170 to
allocate revenues consistent with the relative proportion for the uses
generating the revenues. The report must be submitted no later than January 1,
2003.

(3) The interagency
committee for outdoor recreation shall establish a technical advisory committee
composed of a cross-section of nonhighway road recreational trail users,
including representatives of organized ORV and nonhighway vehicle groups, and
nonmotorized recreation groups, as well as governmental entities maintaining
areas or providing services eligible for funding under RCW 46.09.170, to advise
the agency regarding the study and report required by this section.

(4) The
study will be funded from the nonhighway and off-road vehicle account, and
funds appropriated for purposes of this section are in addition to the agency
general administration expenditure limitations of RCW 46.09.170.

--- END ---