BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF
WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1. RCW 18.106.010 and 1997
c 326 s 2 are each amended to read as follows:

Unless a different
meaning is plainly required by the context, the following words and phrases as
hereinafter used in this chapter shall have the following meaning:

(1) "Advisory
board" means the state advisory board of plumbers;

(2)
"Department" means the department of labor and industries;

(3)
"Director" means the director of department of labor and industries;

(4) "Journeyman
plumber" means any person who has been issued a certificate of competency
by the department of labor and industries as provided in this chapter;

(5) "Medical gas
piping" means oxygen, nitrous oxide, high pressure nitrogen, medical
compressed air, and medical vacuum systems;

(6) "Medical gas
piping installer" means a journeyman plumber who has been issued a medical
gas piping installer endorsement;

(7)
"Plumbing" means that craft involved in installing, altering,
repairing and renovating potable water systems, liquid waste systems, and
medical gas piping systems within a building. Installation in a water system
of water softening or water treatment equipment is not within the meaning of
plumbing as used in this chapter;

(8) "Specialty
plumber" means anyone who has been issued a specialty certificate of
competency limited to:

(a) Installation,
maintenance, and repair of the plumbing of single-family dwellings, duplexes,
and apartment buildings that do not exceed three stories; or

(b) In-line
maintenance of backflow prevention assemblies within buildings. For the
purposes of this subsection, "maintenance" includes cleaning and
replacing parts of an assembly, but does not include installing, altering, or
repairing of backflow prevention assemblies.

Sec. 2. RCW 18.106.040 and 1977
ex.s. c 149 s 4 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) Upon receipt
of the application and evidence set forth in RCW 18.106.030, the director shall
review the same and make a determination as to whether the applicant is
eligible to take an examination for the certificate of competency. To be
eligible to take the examination:

(a) Each
applicant for a journeyman plumber's certificate of competency shall furnish
written evidence that he or she has ((either)) completed a course
of study in the plumbing trade in the armed services of the United States or at
a school accredited by the coordinating council on occupational education((;)),
or ((that he)) has had four or more years of experience under the
direct supervision of a licensed journeyman plumber.

(b) Each
applicant for a specialty plumber's certificate of competency shall furnish
written evidence that he or she has ((either)) completed a course
of study in the plumbing trade in the armed services of the United States or at
a school ((accredited by the commission for vocational education or its
designee)) licensed by the work force training and education
coordinating board under chapter 28C.10 RCW, or that he or she has
had at least three years practical experience in ((his)) the
specialty.

(c) Each applicant
for a backflow prevention assembly specialty plumber's certificate of
competency shall furnish written evidence that he or she is certified as a
backflow assembly tester by the department of health, and is registered as a
contractor by the department.

(2) No other
requirement for eligibility may be imposed.

(3) The director
shall establish reasonable rules and regulations for the examinations to be
given applicants for certificates of competency. In establishing said rules,
regulations, and criteria, the director shall consult with the state advisory
board of plumbers as established in RCW 18.106.110.

(4) Upon
determination that the applicant is eligible to take the examination, the
director shall so notify ((him)) the applicant, indicating the
time and place for taking the same.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
3. A new section is added
to chapter 19.27 RCW to read as follows:

The owner of a building
classified as a group R, division 3 occupancy, as defined in the state building
code adopted under this chapter, shall have the backflow prevention assembly
tested by a department of health certified backflow assembly tester:

(1) At the time of
installation, repair, or relocation, if required by the local official, board,
department, or agency authorized to administer and enforce the provisions of
the uniform plumbing code as adopted under this chapter; or

(2) When
such official, board, department, or agency finds that cross‑connection
control within the property lines of the premises may fail to prevent pollution
or contamination of the domestic water supply.

---
END ---