BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF
WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec.
1. A new section is added
to chapter 67.70 RCW to read as follows:

The Washington state
legislature authorizes the Washington state lottery commission to take actions
necessary to participate with other state lotteries in shared games for the
purpose of generating funds for the purpose of financing the construction of
facilities for the common schools. Moneys generated for construction funding
shall be deposited in the common school construction fund created in RCW
28A.515.320 and shall be used exclusively for common school construction.

Sec. 2. RCW 28A.515.320 and 1996
c 186 s 503 are each amended to read as follows:

The common school
construction fund is to be used exclusively for the purpose of financing the
construction of facilities for the common schools. The sources of said fund
shall be: (1) Those proceeds derived from sale or appropriation of timber and
other crops from school and state land other than those granted for specific
purposes; (2) the interest accruing on the permanent common school fund less
the allocations to the state treasurer's service ((account [fund])) fund
pursuant to RCW 43.08.190 and the state investment board expense account
pursuant to RCW 43.33A.160 together with all rentals and other revenue derived
therefrom and from land and other property devoted to the permanent common
school fund; (3) all moneys received by the state from the United States under
the provisions of section 191, Title 30, United States Code, Annotated, and
under section 810, chapter 12, Title 16, (Conservation), United States Code,
Annotated, except moneys received before June 30, 2001, and when thirty
megawatts of geothermal power is certified as commercially available by the
receiving utilities and the department of community, trade, and economic
development, eighty percent of such moneys, under the Geothermal Steam Act of
1970 pursuant to RCW 43.140.030; ((and)) (4) moneys generated from
shared lottery games under section 1 of this act; and (5) such other
sources as the legislature may direct. That portion of the common school
construction fund derived from interest on the permanent common school fund may
be used to retire such bonds as may be authorized by law for the purpose of
financing the construction of facilities for the common schools.

The interest accruing
on the permanent common school fund less the allocations to the state
treasurer's service fund pursuant to RCW 43.08.190 and the state investment
board expense account pursuant to RCW 43.33A.160 together with all rentals and
other revenues accruing thereto pursuant to subsection (2) of this section
prior to July 1, 1967, shall be exclusively applied to the current use of the
common schools.

To the
extent that the moneys in the common school construction fund are in excess of
the amount necessary to allow fulfillment of the purpose of said fund, the
excess shall be available for deposit to the credit of the permanent common
school fund or available for the current use of the common schools, as the
legislature may direct. Any money from the common school construction fund
which is made available for the current use of the common schools shall be
restored to the fund by appropriation, including interest income foregone,
before the end of the next fiscal biennium following such use.

---
END ---