BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF
WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec.
1. To facilitate national
and international trade in Washington, the legislature is committed to a
coordinated maritime safety program that preserves Washington's marine
environment as an essential and integral part of a healthy economy and meets
the transportation safety needs of the maritime industry. The legislature
finds that improving maritime management protocols in Washington's waters
through providing timely decisions on vessel assistance and rescue, enhancing
the tracking of vessels, and providing advanced communication technology are
important steps to providing protected waters and a sound economy.

The need for these
maritime measures is particularly urgent in protecting Washington waters. The
failure to act now will only increase the potential negative effects on the
environment and the economy. Therefore, the Northwest Maritime Safety Act of
2001 is enacted as a partnership with the maritime industry and the United
States Coast Guard.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
2. The board of pilotage
commissioners shall develop a process for the expeditious response to requests
from the captain of the ports of district 13 of Puget Sound for a tug boat or
tug boats from operators who participate in the international tug of
opportunity system in Puget Sound. The process will enable tug boats to be
called to prevent or mitigate accidents occurring due to adverse weather or
when a vessel or vessels otherwise poses a substantial risk to the Puget Sound
environment as determined by the captain of the port.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
3. (1) The board of pilotage
commissioners shall provide automated information system transponders to pilots
transiting navigable Washington waters in order to assist in tracking the
movement of the vessel while in Puget Sound. If the vessel does not have a
transponder on board when a pilot boards a vessel, the pilot shall temporarily
install a transponder on the vessel. When the vessel leaves Puget Sound, a
pilot shall remove the temporary transponder. A transponder that is not
operating properly will not prevent the pilot from beginning or continuing a
voyage.

(2) In order to provide
enhanced maritime navigation safety, the board of pilotage commissioners shall
provide a credit of two thousand five hundred dollars to vessel operators who
are frequent users of navigable Washington waters of Puget Sound for the
purposes of permanently installing automated information system transponders on
those vessels. This equipment will remain the property or partial property of
the board. If a vessel leaves the Pacific Ocean on a permanent basis, the
vessel owner must return the automated information system transponder or refund
a portion of the value due and as determined by the board. Vessel owners or
their agents may apply for the credit for only one vessel at a time.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
4. The board of pilotage
commissioners may contract with one or more nonprofit maritime organizations
for the administration and management of sections 1 through 6 of this act under
rules adopted by the board. The board may adopt rules with appropriate
procedures, monitoring, and evaluation measures to implement sections 1 through
6 of this act. The board shall not spend more than seven percent of funds
appropriated for purposes of sections 1 through 6 of this act for
administration, training, and other management costs.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
5. The board of pilotage
commissioners shall oversee the establishment of the physical oceanographic
real-time system to provide coverage of the navigable waters of Washington
state. The program shall track vessel movements in order to provide ship
masters and pilots with accurate real-time information required to avoid
groundings and collisions. The board shall take recommendations from maritime
and public interests as to the best location for physical oceanographic
real-time system equipment in Puget Sound waters.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
6. The maritime safety
subaccount is created in the pilotage account. All receipts from private
contributions, foreign funds, federal funds, and legislative appropriations
made to fund the purposes of sections 1 through 5 of this act must be deposited
into the account. Moneys in the subaccount may be spent only after
appropriation.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
7. (1) The sum of one million
six hundred thousand dollars, or as much thereof as may be necessary, is
appropriated for the fiscal biennium ending June 30, 2003, from the multimodal
transportation account to the maritime safety subaccount. One million six
hundred thousand dollars, or as much thereof as may be necessary, is
appropriated for the fiscal biennium ending June 30, 2003, from the maritime
safety subaccount to the board of pilotage commissioners solely for the
purposes of section 2 of this act.

(2) The sum of two
million five hundred thousand dollars, or as much thereof as may be necessary,
is appropriated for the biennium ending June 30, 2003, from the multimodal
transportation account to the maritime safety subaccount. Two million five
hundred thousand dollars, or as much thereof as may be necessary, is
appropriated for the biennium ending June 30, 2003, from the maritime safety
subaccount to the board of pilotage commissioners solely for the purposes set
forth in section 3 of this act and for the following purposes:

(a) As a pilot program,
the board of pilotage commissioners shall provide at least ten laptop computers
to pilots for work in conjunction with the automated information system
transponders. The purpose of the computer is to give to the pilot and the
bridge crew electronic navigational aides, powered grounding and collision
avoidance information, and the ability to better communicate with and see other
vessels.

(b) The board of
pilotage commissioners shall require and pay for training of pilots on the use
of transponder technology and the use of the laptop computers in conjunction
with the automated information system transponders. Money appropriated under
this section must be used for training pilots on the shipboard transponder
technology.

(c) The board of
pilotage commissioners shall report to the transportation committees of the
legislature by January 14, 2002, as to the effectiveness of the laptop
computers in a safety program. If the house and senate transportation
committees affirm that the pilot project was of value in improving maritime
safety sufficient to justify further investment, the board shall purchase
laptop computers for the remaining pilots transiting navigable Washington
waters of Puget Sound, Grays Harbor, and the Columbia River and provide
corresponding training, subject to appropriation. The board shall submit a
final report for biennial review of this entire act by January 13, 2003.

(3) The sum of two
million five hundred thousand dollars, or as much thereof as may be necessary,
is appropriated for the biennium ending June 30, 2003, from the multimodal
transportation account to the maritime safety subaccount. Two million five
hundred thousand dollars, or as much thereof as may be necessary, is
appropriated for the biennium ending June 30, 2003, to the board of pilotage
commissioners for the purposes of purchasing, maintaining, and administering
the navigational systems authorized in section 5 of this act.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
8. The governor of
Washington state shall solicit the states of Oregon and Alaska to determine the
interest of these states in participating in the Northwest Maritime Safety Act
of 2001 on a regional basis.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
9. Sections 1 through 6 of
this act are each added to chapter 88.16 RCW.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 10. This act is necessary for
the immediate preservation of the public peace, health, or safety, or support
of the state government and its existing public institutions, and takes effect
July 1, 2001.

---
END ---