BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF
WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec.
1. It is the legislature's
intent to clarify the law to reflect that boarding homes licensed under chapter
18.20 RCW are engaged in the renting or leasing of real property to consumers
and, accordingly, are exempt from taxation under chapter 82.04 RCW.

Sec. 2. RCW 82.04.050 and 2000
2nd sp.s. c 4 s 23 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) "Sale at
retail" or "retail sale" means every sale of tangible personal
property (including articles produced, fabricated, or imprinted) to all persons
irrespective of the nature of their business and including, among others,
without limiting the scope hereof, persons who install, repair, clean, alter,
improve, construct, or decorate real or personal property of or for consumers
other than a sale to a person who presents a resale certificate under RCW
82.04.470 and who:

(a) Purchases for the
purpose of resale as tangible personal property in the regular course of
business without intervening use by such person, but a purchase for the purpose
of resale by a regional transit authority under RCW 81.112.300 is not a sale
for resale; or

(b) Installs, repairs,
cleans, alters, imprints, improves, constructs, or decorates real or personal
property of or for consumers, if such tangible personal property becomes an
ingredient or component of such real or personal property without intervening
use by such person; or

(c) Purchases for the
purpose of consuming the property purchased in producing for sale a new article
of tangible personal property or substance, of which such property becomes an
ingredient or component or is a chemical used in processing, when the primary
purpose of such chemical is to create a chemical reaction directly through
contact with an ingredient of a new article being produced for sale; or

(d) Purchases for the
purpose of consuming the property purchased in producing ferrosilicon which is
subsequently used in producing magnesium for sale, if the primary purpose of
such property is to create a chemical reaction directly through contact with an
ingredient of ferrosilicon; or

(e) Purchases for the
purpose of providing the property to consumers as part of competitive telephone
service, as defined in RCW 82.04.065. The term shall include every sale of
tangible personal property which is used or consumed or to be used or consumed
in the performance of any activity classified as a "sale at retail"
or "retail sale" even though such property is resold or utilized as
provided in (a), (b), (c), (d), or (e) of this subsection following such use.
The term also means every sale of tangible personal property to persons engaged
in any business which is taxable under RCW 82.04.280 (2) and (7) and 82.04.290.

(2) The term "sale
at retail" or "retail sale" shall include the sale of or charge
made for tangible personal property consumed and/or for labor and services
rendered in respect to the following:

(a) The installing,
repairing, cleaning, altering, imprinting, or improving of tangible personal
property of or for consumers, including charges made for the mere use of
facilities in respect thereto, but excluding charges made for the use of
coin-operated laundry facilities when such facilities are situated in an
apartment house, rooming house, or mobile home park for the exclusive use of
the tenants thereof, and also excluding sales of laundry service to nonprofit
health care facilities, and excluding services rendered in respect to live
animals, birds and insects;

(b) The constructing,
repairing, decorating, or improving of new or existing buildings or other
structures under, upon, or above real property of or for consumers, including
the installing or attaching of any article of tangible personal property
therein or thereto, whether or not such personal property becomes a part of the
realty by virtue of installation, and shall also include the sale of services
or charges made for the clearing of land and the moving of earth excepting the
mere leveling of land used in commercial farming or agriculture;

(c) The charge for
labor and services rendered in respect to constructing, repairing, or improving
any structure upon, above, or under any real property owned by an owner who
conveys the property by title, possession, or any other means to the person
performing such construction, repair, or improvement for the purpose of
performing such construction, repair, or improvement and the property is then
reconveyed by title, possession, or any other means to the original owner;

(d) The sale of or
charge made for labor and services rendered in respect to the cleaning,
fumigating, razing or moving of existing buildings or structures, but shall not
include the charge made for janitorial services; and for purposes of this
section the term "janitorial services" shall mean those cleaning and
caretaking services ordinarily performed by commercial janitor service
businesses including, but not limited to, wall and window washing, floor
cleaning and waxing, and the cleaning in place of rugs, drapes and upholstery.
The term "janitorial services" does not include painting, papering,
repairing, furnace or septic tank cleaning, snow removal or sandblasting;

(e) The sale of or
charge made for labor and services rendered in respect to automobile towing and
similar automotive transportation services, but not in respect to those
required to report and pay taxes under chapter 82.16 RCW;

(f) The sale of and
charge made for the furnishing of lodging and all other services by a hotel,
rooming house, tourist court, motel, trailer camp, and the granting of any
similar license to use real property, as distinguished from the renting or
leasing of real property, and it shall be presumed that the occupancy of real
property for a continuous period of one month or more constitutes a rental or
lease of real property and not a mere license to use or enjoy the same;

(g) The sale of or
charge made for tangible personal property, labor and services to persons
taxable under (a), (b), (c), (d), (e), and (f) of this subsection when such
sales or charges are for property, labor and services which are used or
consumed in whole or in part by such persons in the performance of any activity
defined as a "sale at retail" or "retail sale" even though
such property, labor and services may be resold after such use or consumption.
Nothing contained in this subsection shall be construed to modify subsection
(1) of this section and nothing contained in subsection (1) of this section
shall be construed to modify this subsection.

(3) The term "sale
at retail" or "retail sale" shall include the sale of or charge
made for personal, business, or professional services including amounts
designated as interest, rents, fees, admission, and other service emoluments
however designated, received by persons engaging in the following business
activities:

(a) Amusement and recreation
services including but not limited to golf, pool, billiards, skating, bowling,
ski lifts and tows, day trips for sightseeing purposes, and others, when
provided to consumers;

(b) Abstract, title
insurance, and escrow services;

(c) Credit bureau services;

(d) Automobile parking
and storage garage services;

(e) Landscape
maintenance and horticultural services but excluding (i) horticultural services
provided to farmers and (ii) pruning, trimming, repairing, removing, and
clearing of trees and brush near electric transmission or distribution lines or
equipment, if performed by or at the direction of an electric utility;

(f) Service charges
associated with tickets to professional sporting events; and

(g) The following
personal services: Physical fitness services, tanning salon services, tattoo
parlor services, steam bath services, turkish bath services, escort services,
and dating services.

(4) The term shall also
include the renting or leasing of tangible personal or real property to
consumers and the rental of equipment with an operator. This includes the
renting or leasing of rooms within boarding homes licensed under chapter 18.20
RCW.

(5) The term shall also
include the providing of telephone service, as defined in RCW 82.04.065, to
consumers.

(6) The term shall also
include the sale of canned software other than a sale to a person who presents
a resale certificate under RCW 82.04.470, regardless of the method of delivery
to the end user, but shall not include custom software or the customization of
canned software.

(7) The term shall not
include the sale of or charge made for labor and services rendered in respect
to the building, repairing, or improving of any street, place, road, highway,
easement, right of way, mass public transportation terminal or parking
facility, bridge, tunnel, or trestle which is owned by a municipal corporation
or political subdivision of the state or by the United States and which is used
or to be used primarily for foot or vehicular traffic including mass
transportation vehicles of any kind.

(8) The term shall also
not include sales of chemical sprays or washes to persons for the purpose of
postharvest treatment of fruit for the prevention of scald, fungus, mold, or
decay, nor shall it include sales of feed, seed, seedlings, fertilizer, agents
for enhanced pollination including insects such as bees, and spray materials
to: (a) Persons who participate in the federal conservation reserve program,
the environmental quality incentives program, the wetlands reserve program, and
the wildlife habitat incentives program, or their successors administered by
the United States department of agriculture; (b) farmers for the purpose of
producing for sale any agricultural product; and (c) farmers acting under
cooperative habitat development or access contracts with an organization exempt
from federal income tax under 26 U.S.C. Sec. 501(c)(3) or the Washington state
department of fish and wildlife to produce or improve wildlife habitat on land
that the farmer owns or leases.

(9) The term shall not
include the sale of or charge made for labor and services rendered in respect
to the constructing, repairing, decorating, or improving of new or existing
buildings or other structures under, upon, or above real property of or for the
United States, any instrumentality thereof, or a county or city housing
authority created pursuant to chapter 35.82 RCW, including the installing, or
attaching of any article of tangible personal property therein or thereto,
whether or not such personal property becomes a part of the realty by virtue of
installation. Nor shall the term include the sale of services or charges made
for the clearing of land and the moving of earth of or for the United States,
any instrumentality thereof, or a county or city housing authority. Nor shall
the term include the sale of services or charges made for cleaning up for the
United States, or its instrumentalities, radioactive waste and other byproducts
of weapons production and nuclear research and development.

(10) Until
July 1, 2003, the term shall not include the sale of or charge made for labor
and services rendered for environmental remedial action as defined in RCW
82.04.2635(2).

---
END ---