BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF
WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1. RCW 63.29.350 and 1983 c
179 s 35 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) It is
unlawful for any person to seek or receive from any person or contract with any
person for any fee or compensation for locating or purporting to locate any
property which he or she knows has been reported or paid or delivered to
the department of revenue pursuant to this chapter in excess of:

(a) Five percent
of the property's value ((thereof returned to such owner)) during
the twenty-four month period beginning when the property is paid or delivered
to the department; or

(b) Fifteen percent
of the property's value for the period beginning twenty-four months after the
property is paid or delivered to the department.

(2)
Any person violating this section is guilty of a misdemeanor and shall be fined
not less than the amount of the fee or charge he or she has sought or
received or contracted for, and not more than ten times such amount, or
imprisoned for not more than thirty days, or both.

--- END ---