BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF
WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec.
1. A new section is added
to chapter 18.27 RCW to read as follows:

(1) A contractor
required to register under this chapter who has an individual, whether as a
sole proprietor, partner, or corporate officer of the contractor, required to
register under RCW 9A.44.130 must obtain a restricted certificate of
registration as required in this section.

(2)(a) On receiving an
application for registration as a contractor, or on renewing or reinstating a
contractor's certificate of registration, the department must determine if the
individual, whether a sole proprietor, partner, or corporate officer of the
applicant or contractor, is listed on the sex offender central registry
maintained by the Washington state patrol under RCW 43.43.540. A determination
complies with this section if the department checked the sex offender central
registry, called the Washington state patrol to confirm whether the individual
is on the registry, or followed determination procedures adopted by the
department by rule.

(b) If the individual
being checked under (a) of this subsection is listed on the sex offender
central registry, the department shall issue a restricted certificate of
registration upon the individual's or firm's compliance with the registration
requirements of this chapter. The certificate must be clearly and
conspicuously marked "restricted" on its face. The department shall
provide written information to the certificate holder on the restrictions and
penalties that apply to these certificates under subsection (3) of this
section.

(c) The department may
reissue the certificate of registration without the restriction to a contractor
who establishes that the individual, partner, or corporate officer, as
applicable, has been lawfully removed from the sex offender central registry.

(3)(a) It is an
infraction under this chapter:

(i) For a contractor to
advertise, offer to do work, submit a bid, or perform any work as a contractor
without a restricted certificate of registration if the contractor, whether a
sole proprietor, partner, or corporate officer of the contractor, is required
to register under RCW 9A.44.130; or

(ii) For an individual
to enter or remain in an occupied dwelling or place of residence, or a place in
which the individual would have unsupervised contact with minors, while working
as a contractor under a restricted certificate of registration unless the
contractor is accompanied by another employee of the contractor. The employee
may not be an individual required to register under RCW 9A.44.130.

(b) A contractor found
to have committed an infraction under this section shall have its registration
revoked and shall not be eligible for registration under this chapter until the
contractor establishes that the individual, partner, or corporate officer, as
applicable, has been lawfully removed from the sex offender central registry.

(4) No liability may be
imposed on the department or its employees for release of information regarding
sex offenders that results from complying with this section or RCW 18.27.120 or
for failing to release such information. When a determination is made under
subsection (2) of this section, nothing in this section is intended to be,
shall be construed to create, or forms the basis for liability on the part of
the department or its employees.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
2. A new section is added
to chapter 18.106 RCW to read as follows:

(1) A person who is
required to obtain a certificate of competency, temporary permit, endorsement,
or training certificate to engage in the trade of plumbing under this chapter
and who is required to register under RCW 9A.44.130 must obtain a restricted
certificate, permit, or endorsement as required in this section.

(2)(a) On receiving an
application for a certificate of competency, a temporary permit, an
endorsement, or a training certificate, or on renewing or reinstating a
certificate, permit, or endorsement, the department must determine if the
person is listed on the sex offender central registry maintained by the
Washington state patrol under RCW 43.43.540. A determination complies with this
section if the department checked the sex offender central registry, called the
Washington state patrol to confirm whether the person is on the registry, or
followed determination procedures adopted by the department by rule.

(b) If the person being
checked under (a) of this subsection is listed on the sex offender central
registry, the department shall issue a restricted certificate, permit, or
endorsement, upon the person's compliance with this chapter. The certificate,
permit, or endorsement must be clearly and conspicuously marked
"restricted" on its face. The department shall provide written
information to the holder on the restrictions and penalties that apply to these
certificates, permits, and endorsements under subsection (3) of this section.

(c) The department may
reissue a certificate, permit, or endorsement without the restriction to a
person who establishes that he or she has been lawfully removed from the sex
offender central registry.

(3)(a) It is an
infraction under this chapter:

(i) For a person to
engage in the trade of plumbing without a restricted certificate, permit, or
endorsement if the person is required to register under RCW 9A.44.130; or

(ii) For a person to
enter or remain in an occupied dwelling or place of residence, or a place in
which the person would have unsupervised contact with minors, while working as
a plumber under a restricted certificate, permit, or endorsement unless the
person is accompanied by another employee of the person's employer. The
accompanying person may not be a person who is required to register under RCW
9A.44.130.

(b) A person found to
have committed an infraction under this section shall have his or her
certificate, permit, or endorsement revoked and shall not be eligible for a
certificate, permit, or endorsement under this chapter until the person
establishes that he or she has been lawfully removed from the sex offender
central registry.

(4) No liability may be
imposed on the department or its employees for release of information regarding
sex offenders that results from complying with this section or for failing to
release such information. When a determination is made under subsection (2) of
this section, nothing in this section is intended to be, shall be construed to
create, or forms the basis for liability on the part of the department or its
employees.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
3. A new section is added
to chapter 19.28 RCW to be codified under the subchapter heading
"provisions applicable to electrical installations" to read as
follows:

(1) A person who is
required to obtain a certificate of competency, temporary permit, or electrical
training certificate to engage in the electrical construction trade under this
chapter and who is required to register under RCW 9A.44.130 must obtain a
restricted certificate as required in this section.

(2)(a) On receiving an
application for a certificate of competency, temporary permit, or electrical
training certificate, or on renewing or reinstating a certificate or permit,
the department must determine if the person is listed on the sex offender central
registry maintained by the Washington state patrol under RCW 43.43.540. A
determination complies with this section if the department checked the sex
offender central registry, called the Washington state patrol to confirm
whether the person is on the registry, or followed determination procedures
adopted by the department by rule.

(b) If the person being
checked under (a) of this subsection is listed on the sex offender central
registry, the department shall issue a restricted certificate or permit, upon
the person's compliance with this chapter. The certificate or permit must be
clearly and conspicuously marked "restricted" on its face. The
department shall provide written information to the holder on the restrictions
and penalties that apply to these certificates and permits under subsection (3)
of this section.

(c) The department may
reissue a certificate or permit without the restriction to a person who
establishes that he or she has been lawfully removed from the sex offender
central registry.

(3)(a) It is a
violation of RCW 19.28.161 through 19.28.271:

(i) For a person to
engage in the electrical construction trade without a restricted certificate or
permit if the person is required to register under RCW 9A.44.130; or

(ii) For a person to enter
or remain in an occupied dwelling or place of residence, or a place in which
the person would have unsupervised contact with minors, while working as an
electrician under a restricted certificate or permit unless the person is
accompanied by another employee of the person's employer. The accompanying
person may not be a person who is required to register under RCW 9A.44.130.

(b) A person found to
have violated this section shall have his or her certificate or permit revoked
and shall not be eligible for a license, certificate, or permit under this
chapter until the person establishes that he or she has been lawfully removed
from the sex offender central registry.

(4) No liability may be
imposed on the department or its employees for release of information regarding
sex offenders that results from complying with this section or for failing to
release such information. When a determination is made under subsection (2) of
this section, nothing in this section is intended to be, shall be construed to create,
or forms the basis for liability on the part of the department or its
employees.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
4. A new section is added
to chapter 19.28 RCW to be codified under the subchapter heading
"provisions applicable to electrical installations and telecommunications
installations" to read as follows:

(1) An entity required
to obtain an electrical or telecommunications contractor license, or a person
required to obtain an electrical or telecommunications contractor administrator
certificate, to engage in the electrical construction trade under this chapter
who has an individual, whether as a sole proprietor, partner, or corporate
officer of the entity, required to register under RCW 9A.44.130 must obtain a
restricted license or certificate as required in this section.

(2)(a) On receiving an
application from an entity for an electrical or telecommunications contractor
license or an individual for an electrical or telecommunications contractor
administrator certificate, or on renewing or reinstating a license or
certificate, the department must determine if the individual, whether a sole
proprietor, partner, or corporate officer of the entity, is listed on the sex
offender central registry maintained by the Washington state patrol under RCW
43.43.540. A determination complies with this section if the department
checked the sex offender central registry, called the Washington state patrol
to confirm whether the individual is on the registry, or followed determination
procedures adopted by the department by rule.

(b) If the individual
being checked under (a) of this subsection is listed on the sex offender
central registry, the department shall issue a restricted license or
certificate upon the entity's compliance with this chapter. The license or
certificate must be clearly and conspicuously marked "restricted" on
its face. The department shall provide written information to the holder on
the restrictions and penalties that apply to these licenses and certificates under
subsection (3) of this section.

(c) The department may
reissue a license or certificate without the restriction to an entity who
establishes that the individual, partner, or corporate officer, as applicable,
has been lawfully removed from the sex offender central registry.

(3)(a) It is a
violation of the licensure requirements of this chapter:

(i) For an entity to
engage in, conduct, or carry on the electrical construction business as
specified in RCW 19.28.041 without a restricted electrical contractor license
if the contractor, whether a sole proprietor, partner, or corporate officer of
the contractor, is required to register under RCW 9A.44.130;

(ii) For an entity to
carry on the business of installing or maintaining telecommunications systems
as specified in RCW 19.28.420 without a restricted telecommunications
contractor license if the contractor, whether a sole proprietor, partner, or
corporate officer of the contractor, is required to register under RCW
9A.44.130;

(iii) For an individual
to work as an electrical contractor administrator or telecommunications
contractor administrator without a restricted administrator's certificate if
the individual is required to register under RCW 9A.44.130; or

(iv) For an individual
to enter or remain in an occupied dwelling or place of residence, or a place in
which the individual would have unsupervised contact with minors, while working
as an electrical or telecommunications contractor or an electrical or
telecommunications administrator under a restricted license or certificate
unless the individual is accompanied by another employee of the contractor.
The accompanying individual may not be an individual who is required to
register under RCW 9A.44.130.

(b) An individual or
entity found to have violated this section shall have his or her license or
certificate revoked and shall not be eligible for a license or certificate
under this chapter until the individual or entity establishes that the
individual, partner, or corporate officer, as applicable, has been lawfully
removed from the sex offender central registry.

(4) No
liability may be imposed on the department or its employees for release of
information regarding sex offenders that results from complying with this
section or for failing to release such information. When a determination is
made under subsection (2) of this section, nothing in this section is intended
to be, shall be construed to create, or forms the basis for liability on the
part of the department or its employees.

---
END ---