BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF
WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec.
1. A new section is added
to chapter 47.04 RCW to read as follows:

In honor
of the state of Washington's veterans of foreign wars, who have served both
their state and their nation through noble sacrifice on foreign soil, the north
Spokane corridor project, commonly known as the north-south freeway, shall be
officially named the "Washington Veterans of Foreign Wars Memorial
Highway." Upon completion of the project, the department of
transportation shall erect at least two signs displaying the designation, one
addressing each direction of travel.

--- END ---