BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF
WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec.
1. The legislature
recognizes that tax preferences are enacted by the legislature to meet public
interest objectives. The legislature finds, however, that some tax preferences
may not be efficient or equitable tools for the achievement of current legislative
objectives. The legislature finds that unless the public interest is served by
the continued existence of tax preferences, they should be terminated or
modified. The legislature further finds that an evaluation of tax preferences
is needed to determine if they continue to serve the public interest. It is
the intent of the legislature to create a procedure to evaluate and terminate
tax preferences. By this procedure the legislature intends to ensure that
thorough evaluations are made and that tax preferences which do not continue to
serve the public interest are repealed.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
2. A new section is added
to chapter 43.131 RCW to read as follows:

(1) The definitions in
this subsection apply for the purposes of this section.

(a) "Tax
preference" means an exemption, exclusion, or deduction from the base of a
state tax; a credit against a state tax; a deferral of a state tax; or a
preferential state tax rate.

(b) "Selected tax
preference" is a tax preference which reduces state tax revenue by more
than five million dollars in a biennium.

(c) "Selection
biennium" means the biennium for which the tax preference's state revenue
reduction first exceeds five million dollars.

(2) All selected tax
preferences enacted after the effective date of this act shall be reviewed
under this chapter before July 1st of the third year after the selection
biennium. The review shall include, but is not limited to, the following:

(a) Public interest
objectives that provide a justification for the tax preference;

(b) Evidence that the
tax preference has contributed to the achievement of these public interest
objectives; and

(c) Fiscal impacts of
the tax preference, including past impacts and expected future impacts if the
tax preference is not repealed.

(3) The agency
responsible for administering the tax preference shall provide information
necessary for the joint legislative audit and review committee to conduct the
required review.

(4) All
selected tax preferences enacted after the effective date of this act are
repealed effective June 30th of the fourth year after the selection biennium.
A tax preference shall not be excepted from this section without specific
amendment to this section in conformance with Article II, section 37 of the
state Constitution.

---
END ---