BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF
WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec.
1. A new section is added
to chapter 36.93 RCW to read as follows:

For a proposal by a
city to assume less than all of the area of a water-sewer district pursuant to
chapter 35.13A RCW:

(1) The board shall
consider the effect of the proposal on the following factors, in addition to
the factors of RCW 36.93.170:

(a) Rates and charges
for the city and district systems;

(b) Operation and
maintenance of the city and district systems;

(c) Staffing levels and
employees of the city and district;

(d) Condition, age, and
type of system facilities in the city and district;

(e) Water supply rights
and contracts and sewer service contracts; and

(f) Financing of
capital improvements to the city and district systems.

(2) The board shall, in
accordance with the first paragraph of RCW 35.13A.050, identify the relevant
facilities and determine as part of its decision the economically useful life,
sufficient capacity availability, and reasonable rates for the facilities.

(3) The board shall
determine as part of its decision a division of assets and liabilities between
the city and district.

(4) The
board shall hire a consultant or consultants to prepare a report on the
factors, identifications, and determinations of subsections (1), (2), and (3)
of this section. The consultants shall consider any information or reports
prepared by the city and district regarding the proposal. The cost of the
consultant's report shall be borne by the city.

--- END ---