BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF
WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1. RCW 46.61.687 and 2000 c
190 s 2 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) Whenever a child
who is less than sixteen years of age is being transported in a motor vehicle
that is in operation and that is required by RCW 46.37.510 to be equipped with
a safety belt system in a passenger seating position, the driver of the vehicle
shall keep the child properly restrained as follows:

(a) If the child is
less than six years old and((/or)) sixty pounds and the passenger
seating position equipped with a safety belt system allows sufficient space for
installation, then the child will be restrained in a child restraint system
that complies with standards of the United States department of transportation
and that is secured in the vehicle in accordance with instructions of the
manufacturer of the child restraint system;

(b) If the child is
less than one year of age or weighs less than twenty pounds, the child shall be
properly restrained in a rear-facing infant seat;

(c) If the child is
more than one but less than four years of age ((or)) and weighs
less than forty pounds but at least twenty pounds, the child shall be properly
restrained in a forward facing child safety seat restraint system;

(d) If the child is
less than six but at least four years of age ((or)) and weighs
less than sixty pounds but at least forty pounds, the child shall be properly
restrained in a child booster seat;

(e) If the child is six
years of age or older ((or)) and weighs more than sixty pounds,
the child shall be properly restrained with the motor vehicle's safety belt
properly adjusted and fastened around the child's body or an appropriately
fitting booster seat; and

(f) Enforcement of (a)
through (e) of this subsection is subject to a visual inspection by law
enforcement to determine if the child restraint system in use is appropriate
for the child's individual height, weight, and age. The visual inspection for
usage of a ((forward facing)) child safety seat must ensure that the
seat in use is equipped with a ((four-point)) shoulder harness system.
The visual inspection for usage of a booster seat must ensure that the seat
belt properly fits across the child's lap and the shoulder strap crosses the
center of the child's chest. The visual inspection for the usage of a seat
belt by a child must ensure that the lap belt properly fits across the child's
lap and the shoulder strap crosses the center of the child's chest. In
determining violations, consideration to the above criteria must be given in
conjunction with the provisions of (a) through (e) of this subsection. The
driver of a vehicle transporting a child who is under the age of six years old
or weighs less than sixty pounds, when the vehicle is equipped with a passenger
side air bag supplemental restraint system, and the air bag system is
activated, shall transport the child in the back seat positions in the vehicle
where it is practical to do so.

(2) A person violating
subsection (1)(a) through (e) of this section may be issued a notice of traffic
infraction under chapter 46.63 RCW. If the person to whom the notice was
issued presents proof of acquisition of an approved child passenger restraint
system or a child booster seat, as appropriate, within seven days to the
jurisdiction issuing the notice and the person has not previously had a
violation of this section dismissed, the jurisdiction shall dismiss the notice
of traffic infraction.

(3) Failure to comply
with the requirements of this section shall not constitute negligence by a
parent or legal guardian; nor shall failure to use a child restraint system be
admissible as evidence of negligence in any civil action.

(4) This section does
not apply to: (a) For hire vehicles, (b) vehicles designed to transport
sixteen or less passengers, including the driver, operated by auto transportation
companies, as defined in RCW 81.68.010, (c) vehicles providing customer shuttle
service between parking, convention, and hotel facilities, and airport
terminals, and (d) school buses.

(5) As used in this
section "child booster seat" means a child passenger restraint system
that meets the Federal Motor Vehicle Safety Standards set forth in 49 C.F.R.
571.213 that is designed to elevate a child to properly sit in a federally
approved lap/shoulder belt system.

(6) The requirements of
subsection (1)(a) through (e) of this section do not apply in any seating
position where there is only a lap belt available and the child weighs more
than forty pounds.

(7) A person,
including but not limited to a volunteer provider of services, who renders
inspection, adjustment, or educational services regarding child passenger
restraint systems is not liable for civil damages from any act or omission in
rendering the services, other than acts or omissions constituting gross
negligence or willful or wanton misconduct.

Sec. 2. RCW 46.61.688 and 2000 c
190 s 3 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) For the purposes of
this section, the term "motor vehicle" includes:

(a) "Buses,"
meaning motor vehicles with motive power, except trailers, designed to carry
more than ten passengers;

(b) "Multipurpose
passenger vehicles," meaning motor vehicles with motive power, except
trailers, designed to carry ten persons or less that are constructed either on
a truck chassis or with special features for occasional off-road operation;

(c) "Passenger
cars," meaning motor vehicles with motive power, except multipurpose
passenger vehicles, motorcycles, or trailers, designed for carrying ten
passengers or less; and

(d) "Trucks,"
meaning motor vehicles with motive power, except trailers, designed primarily
for the transportation of property.

(2) This section only
applies to motor vehicles that meet the manual seat belt safety standards as
set forth in federal motor vehicle safety standard 208. This section does not
apply to a vehicle occupant for whom no safety belt is available when all
designated seating positions as required by federal motor vehicle safety
standard 208 are occupied.

(3) Every person
sixteen years of age or older operating or riding in a motor vehicle shall wear
the safety belt assembly in a properly adjusted and securely fastened manner.

(4) No person may
operate a motor vehicle unless all child passengers under the age of sixteen
years are either: (a) Wearing a safety belt assembly or (b) are securely
fastened into an approved child restraint device.

(5) A person violating
this section shall be issued a notice of traffic infraction under chapter 46.63
RCW. A finding that a person has committed a traffic infraction under this
section shall be contained in the driver's abstract but shall not be available
to insurance companies or employers.

(6) Failure to comply
with the requirements of this section does not constitute negligence, nor may
failure to wear a safety belt assembly be admissible as evidence of negligence
in any civil action.

(7) Except for
subsection (4)(((b))) of this section, which must be enforced as a
primary action, enforcement of this section by law enforcement officers may be
accomplished only as a secondary action when a driver of a motor vehicle has
been detained for a suspected violation of Title 46 RCW or an equivalent local
ordinance or some other offense.

(8) This section does
not apply to an operator or passenger who possesses written verification from a
licensed physician that the operator or passenger is unable to wear a safety
belt for physical or medical reasons.

(9) The state patrol
may adopt rules exempting operators or occupants of farm vehicles, construction
equipment, and vehicles that are required to make frequent stops from the
requirement of wearing safety belts.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 3. This act takes effect
July 1, 2002.

---
END ---