BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF
WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec.
1. A new section is added
to chapter 77.12 RCW to read as follows:

(1) The department
shall operate an agency program for the removal and disposal of derelict
fishing gear. The derelict fishing gear program may include activities to:
Create and maintain a data base of known derelict fishing gear, provide for
public reporting of located derelict fishing gear, reduce the future losses of
fishing gear, search out sites where derelict fishing gear has been reported as
lost, evaluate and prioritize derelict fishing gear sites for removal, or
develop tools to remove derelict fishing gear or to render it ineffective.

(2) In implementing and
operating the derelict fishing gear program, the department must coordinate
with interest groups, tribal comanagers, and other interested parties.

(3) The department may
contract for the removal of derelict fishing gear or for other components of
the derelict fishing gear program.

(4) The department must
investigate the feasibility of different methods to encourage or require the
reporting of lost fishing gear by commercial and recreational fishers. The
department shall report the results of this investigation, along with agency recommendations,
to the appropriate legislative committees by January 1, 2003.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
2. (1) The sum of two
hundred six thousand dollars, or as much thereof as may be necessary, is
appropriated for the fiscal year ending June 30, 2002, from the general fund to
the department of fish and wildlife for the purposes of this act.

(2) The sum of two
hundred six thousand dollars, or as much thereof as may be necessary, is
appropriated for the fiscal year ending June 30, 2003, from the general fund to
the department of fish and wildlife for the purposes of this act.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 3. If specific funding for
the purposes of this act, referencing this act by bill or chapter number, is
not provided by June 30, 2001, this act is null and void.

---
END ---