BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF
WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec.
1. It is the intent of the
legislature to promote fairness in the application of tax. Therefore, for the
purposes of excise tax, park model trailers will be taxed in the same manner as
mobile homes.

Sec. 2. RCW 82.45.032 and 1993
sp.s. c 25 s 504 are each amended to read as follows:

Unless the context
clearly requires otherwise, the definitions in this section apply throughout
this chapter.

(1) "Real
estate" or "real property" means any interest, estate, or
beneficial interest in land or anything affixed to land, including the
ownership interest or beneficial interest in any entity which itself owns land
or anything affixed to land. The term includes used mobile homes, used park
model trailers, used floating homes, and improvements constructed upon
leased land.

(2) "Used mobile
home" means a mobile home which has been previously sold at retail and has
been subjected to tax under chapter 82.08 RCW, or which has been previously
used and has been subjected to tax under chapter 82.12 RCW, and which has
substantially lost its identity as a mobile unit at the time of sale by virtue
of its being fixed in location upon land owned or leased by the owner of the
mobile home and placed on a foundation (posts or blocks) with fixed pipe connections
with sewer, water, and other utilities.

(3) "Mobile
home" means a mobile home as defined by RCW 46.04.302, as now or hereafter
amended.

(4) "Park model
trailer" means a park model trailer as defined in RCW 46.04.622.

(5) "Used
floating home" means a floating home in respect to which tax has been paid
under chapter 82.08 or 82.12 RCW.

(((5))) (6)
"Used park model trailer" means a park model trailer that has been
previously sold at retail and has been subjected to tax under chapter 82.08
RCW, or that has been previously used and has been subjected to tax under
chapter 82.12 RCW, and that has substantially lost its identity as a mobile
unit by virtue of its being permanently sited in location and placed on a
foundation of either posts or blocks with connections with sewer, water, or
other utilities for the operation of installed fixtures and appliances.

(7)
"Floating home" means a building on a float used in whole or in part
for human habitation as a single-family dwelling, which is not designed for
self propulsion by mechanical means or for propulsion by means of wind, and
which is on the property tax rolls of the county in which it is located.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 3. This act takes effect
August 1, 2001.

---
END ---