BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF
WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec.
1. The legislature intends
to enable the Washington state ferry system to authorize other entities to sell
tickets and medium for passage on Washington state ferries. This will increase
convenience for customers and help reduce congestion at ferry ticket booths.

Sec. 2. RCW 47.64.120 and 1997 c
436 s 1 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) Ferry system
management and ferry system employee organizations, through their collective
bargaining representatives, shall meet at reasonable times, to negotiate in
good faith with respect to wages, hours, working conditions, insurance, and
health care benefits as limited by RCW 47.64.270, and other matters mutually
agreed upon.

(a) Employer
funded retirement benefits shall be provided under the public employees'
retirement system under chapter 41.40 RCW and shall not be included in the
scope of collective bargaining.

(b) Ferry system
ticket and medium sales are not the exclusive work jurisdiction of a ferry
system employee organization, and the authorization of other entities to sell
ferry medium may not be included in the scope of collective bargaining.

(2) Upon
ratification of bargaining agreements, ferry employees are entitled to an
amount equivalent to the interest earned on retroactive compensation
increases. For purposes of this section, the interest earned on retroactive
compensation increases is the same monthly rate of interest that was earned on
the amount of the compensation increases while held in the state treasury. The
interest will be computed for each employee until the date the retroactive
compensation is paid, and must be allocated in accordance with appropriation
authority. The interest earned on retroactive compensation is not considered
part of the ongoing compensation obligation of the state and is not
compensation earnable for the purposes of chapter 41.40 RCW. Negotiations
shall also include grievance procedures for resolving any questions arising
under the agreement, which shall be embodied in a written agreement and signed
by the parties.

---
END ---