BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF
WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1. RCW 35.57.010 and 1999 c
165 s 1 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) The legislative
authority of any town or city located in a county with a population of less
than one million may create a public facilities district. The legislative
authorities of any contiguous group of towns or cities located in a county or
counties each with a population of less than one million may enter an agreement
under chapter 39.34 RCW for the creation and joint operation of a public
facilities district. The legislative authority of any town or city, or any
contiguous group of towns or cities, located in a county with a population of
less than one million and the legislative authority of the county or counties
in which the towns or cities are located may enter into an agreement under
chapter 39.34 RCW for the creation and joint operation of a public facilities
district.

(2) A public facilities
district shall be coextensive with the boundaries of the city or town or
contiguous group of cities or towns that created the district. A public
facilities district created by an agreement between a town or city, or a
contiguous group of towns or cities, and the county in which they are located
shall be coextensive with the boundaries of the towns or cities, and the
boundaries of the county or counties as to the unincorporated areas of the
county or counties. The boundaries shall not include towns or cities that are
not parties to the agreement for the creation and joint operation of the
district.

(3)(a) A public
facilities district created by a single city or town shall be governed by a
board of directors consisting of five members selected as follows: (i) Two
members appointed by the legislative authority of the city or town; and (ii)
three members appointed by legislative authority based on recommendations from
local organizations. The members appointed under (a)(i) of this subsection,
shall not be members of the legislative authority of the city or town. The
members appointed under (a)(ii) of this subsection, shall be based on
recommendations received from local organizations that may include, but are not
limited to the local chamber of commerce, local economic development council,
and local labor council. The members shall serve four-year terms. Of the
initial members, one must be appointed for a one-year term, one must be
appointed for a two-year term, one must be appointed for a three-year term, and
the remainder must be appointed for four-year terms.

(b) A public facilities
district created by (([a])) a contiguous group of cities and
towns shall be governed by a board of directors consisting of seven members
selected as follows: (i) Three members appointed by the legislative
authorities of the cities and towns; and (ii) four members appointed by the
legislative authority based on recommendations from local organizations. The
members appointed under (b)(i) of this subsection shall not be members of the
legislative authorities of the cities and towns. The members appointed under
(b)(ii) of this subsection, shall be based on recommendations received from
local organizations that include, but are not limited to the local chamber of
commerce, local economic development council, local labor council, and a
neighborhood organization that is directly affected by the location of the ((regional
center)) public facility in their area. The members of the board of
directors shall be appointed in accordance with the terms of the agreement
under chapter 39.34 RCW for the joint operation of the district and shall serve
four-year terms. Of the initial members, one must be appointed for a one-year
term, one must be appointed for a two-year term, one must be appointed for a
three-year term, and the remainder must be appointed for four-year terms.

(c) A public
facilities district created by a town or city, or a contiguous group of towns
or cities, and the county or counties in which they are located shall be
governed by a board of directors consisting of seven members selected as
follows: (i) Three members appointed by the legislative authorities of the
cities, towns, and county; and (ii) four members appointed by the sitting
members of the board of directors based on recommendations from local
organizations. The members appointed under (c)(i) of this subsection shall not
be members of the legislative authorities of the cities, towns, or county. The
members appointed under (c)(ii) of this subsection shall be based on
recommendations received from local organizations that include, but are not
limited to, the local chamber of commerce, local economic development council,
local labor council, and a neighborhood organization that is directly affected
by the location of the regional center in their area. The members of the board
of directors shall be appointed in accordance with the terms of the agreement
under chapter 39.34 RCW for the joint operation of the district and shall serve
four-year terms. Of the initial members, one must be appointed for a one-year
term, one must be appointed for a two-year term, one must be appointed for a
three-year term, and the remainder must be appointed for four-year terms.

(4) A public facilities
district is a municipal corporation, an independent taxing
"authority" within the meaning of Article VII, section 1 of the state
Constitution, and a "taxing district" within the meaning of Article
VII, section 2 of the state Constitution.

(5) A public facilities
district shall constitute a body corporate and shall possess all the usual
powers of a corporation for public purposes as well as all other powers that
may now or hereafter be specifically conferred by statute, including, but not
limited to, the authority to hire employees, staff, and services, to enter into
contracts, and to sue and be sued.

(6) A public facilities
district may acquire and transfer real and personal property by lease,
sublease, purchase, or sale. No direct or collateral attack on any ((metropolitan))
public facilities district purported to be authorized or created in
conformance with this chapter may be commenced more than thirty days after creation
by the county, city, or town legislative authority.

Sec. 2. RCW 35.57.020 and 1999 c
165 s 2 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) A public facilities
district is authorized to acquire, construct, own, remodel, maintain, equip,
reequip, repair, finance, and operate one or more ((regional centers)) public
facilities. For purposes of this chapter, (("regional center"))
"public facility" means a convention, conference, cultural,
community, technology, recreational, or special events center, or any
combination of facilities, and related parking facilities((, serving a
regional population)) constructed, improved, or rehabilitated after July
25, 1999, at a cost of at least ten million dollars, including debt service.
(("Regional center")) A "special events center"
is a facility or combination of facilities, the primary purpose of which is the
presentation of events, activities, performances, or exhibits for the enjoyment
of the general public. "Public facility" also includes an
existing convention, conference, cultural, community, technology,
recreational, or special events center, and related parking facilities((,
serving a regional population,)) that is acquired, improved,
or rehabilitated after July 25, 1999, where the costs of acquisition,
improvement, or rehabilitation are at least ten million dollars,
including debt service. ((A regional center is conclusively presumed to
serve a regional population if state and local government investment in the
construction, improvement, or rehabilitation of the regional center is equal to
or greater than ten million dollars.))

(2) A public facilities
district may impose charges and fees for the use of its facilities, and may
accept and expend or use gifts, grants, and donations for the purpose of a ((regional
center)) public facility.

(3) A public facilities
district may impose charges, fees, and taxes authorized in RCW 35.57.040, and
use revenues derived therefrom for the purpose of paying principal and interest
payments on bonds issued by the public facilities district to construct a ((regional
center)) public facility.

(4) Notwithstanding the
establishment of a career, civil, or merit service system, a public facilities
district may contract with a public or private entity for the operation or
management of its public facilities.

(5) A public facilities
district is authorized to use the supplemental alternative public works
contracting procedures set forth in chapter 39.10 RCW in connection with the
design, construction, reconstruction, remodel, or alteration of any ((regional
center)) public facility.

Sec. 3. RCW 35.57.040 and 1999 c
165 s 4 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) The board of
directors of the public facilities district may impose the following for the
purpose of funding a ((regional center)) public facility:

(a) Charges and fees
for the use of any of its facilities;

(b) Admission charges
under RCW 35.57.100;

(c) Vehicle parking
charges under RCW 35.57.110; and

(d) Sales and use taxes
authorized under RCW 82.14.048 and 82.14.390.

(2) The board may accept
and expend or use gifts, grants, and donations for the purpose of a ((regional
center)) public facility. The revenue from the charges, fees, and
taxes imposed under this section shall be used only for the purposes authorized
by this chapter.

Sec. 4. RCW 35.57.060 and 1999 c
165 s 6 are each amended to read as follows:

The board of directors
of the public facilities district shall have authority to authorize the
expenditure of funds for the public purposes of preparing and distributing
information to the general public and promoting, advertising, improving,
developing, operating, and maintaining a ((regional center)) public
facility. Nothing contained in this section may be construed to authorize
preparation and distribution of information to the general public for the
purpose of influencing the outcome of a district election.

Sec. 5. RCW 35.57.100 and 1999 c
165 s 10 are each amended to read as follows:

A public facility
district may levy and fix a tax of not more than one cent on twenty cents or
fraction thereof to be paid by the person who pays an admission charge to a ((regional
center)) public facility. This includes a tax on persons who are
admitted free of charge or at reduced rates if other persons pay a charge or a
regular higher charge for the same privileges or accommodations.

The term
"admission charge" includes:

(1) A charge made for
season tickets or subscriptions;

(2) A cover charge, or
a charge made for use of seats and tables reserved or otherwise, and other
similar accommodations;

(3) A charge made for
food and refreshment if free entertainment, recreation, or amusement is
provided;

(4) A charge made for
rental or use of equipment or facilities for purposes of recreation or
amusement; if the rental of the equipment or facilities is necessary to the
enjoyment of a privilege for which a general admission is charged, the combined
charges shall be considered as the admission charge;

(5) ((Automobile))
Motor vehicle parking charges if the amount of the charge is determined
according to the number of passengers in the ((automobile)) motor
vehicle.

Sec. 6. RCW 35.57.110 and 1999 c
165 s 11 are each amended to read as follows:

A public facility district
may levy and fix a tax on any vehicle parking charges imposed at any parking
facility that is owned or leased by the public facility district as part of a
((regional center)) public facility. No county or city or town
within which the ((regional center)) public facility is located
may impose a tax of the same or similar kind on any vehicle parking charges at
the facility. For the purposes of this section, "vehicle parking
charges" means only the actual parking charges exclusive of taxes and
service charges and the value of any other benefit conferred. The tax
authorized under this section shall be at the rate of not more than ten
percent.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
7. A new section is added
to chapter 35.57 RCW to read as follows:

(1) A public facilities
district may apply for deferral of taxes on site preparation, construction of
buildings or other structures, and acquisition of related machinery and
equipment, for a public facility. Application shall be made to the department
of revenue in a form and manner prescribed by the department of revenue. The
application shall contain information regarding the location of the public
facility, estimated or actual costs, time schedules for completion and
operation, and other information required by the department of revenue. The
department of revenue shall approve the application within sixty days if it
meets the requirements of this section.

(2) The department of
revenue shall issue a sales and use tax deferral certificate for state and
local sales and use taxes due under chapters 82.08, 82.12, and 82.14 RCW on the
public facility. The use of the certificate shall be governed by rules
established by the department of revenue.

(3) The public
facilities district shall begin paying the deferred taxes in the fifth year
after the date certified by the department of revenue as the date on which the
public facility is operationally complete. The first payment is due on
December 31st of the fifth calendar year after such certified date, with
subsequent annual payments due on December 31st of the following nine years.
Each payment shall equal ten percent of the deferred tax.

(4) The department of
revenue may authorize an accelerated repayment schedule upon request of the
public facilities district.

(5) Interest shall not
be charged on any taxes deferred under this section for the period of deferral,
although all other penalties and interest applicable to delinquent excise taxes
may be assessed and imposed for delinquent payments under this section. The
debt for deferred taxes is not extinguished by insolvency or other failure of
the public facilities district.

(6) Applications and
any other information received by the department of revenue under this section
are not confidential and are subject to disclosure. Chapter 82.32 RCW applies
to the administration of this section.

Sec. 8. RCW 36.100.010 and 1995
3rd sp.s. c 1 s 301 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) A public facilities
district may be created in any county and shall be coextensive with the
boundaries of the county. Multiple public facilities districts may be
created in any county, each coextensive with the boundaries of the county, so
long as: (a) The resolution adopted by the county legislative authority
providing for the creation of each public facilities district limits the
authority of each of these public facilities districts to acquiring,
constructing, owning, remodeling, maintaining, equipping, reequipping,
repairing, and operating specifically enumerated sports facilities,
recreational facilities, entertainment facilities, convention facilities, or
public facilities, as defined in RCW 35.57.020, together with contiguous
parking facilities; and (b) no other public facilities district within the
county is authorized to acquire, construct, own, remodel, maintain, equip,
reequip, repair, or operate such specifically enumerated sports facilities,
recreational facilities, entertainment facilities, convention facilities, or
public facilities, as defined in RCW 35.57.020, together with contiguous
parking facilities.

(2) A public facilities
district shall be created upon adoption of a resolution providing for the
creation of such a district by the county legislative authority in which the
proposed district is located.

(3) A public facilities
district is a municipal corporation, an independent taxing
"authority" within the meaning of Article VII, section 1 of the state
Constitution, and a "taxing district" within the meaning of Article
VII, section 2 of the state Constitution.

(4) No taxes authorized
under this chapter may be assessed or levied unless a majority of the voters of
the public facilities district has approved such tax at a general or special
election. A single ballot proposition may both validate the imposition of the
sales and use tax under RCW 82.14.048 and the excise tax under RCW 36.100.040.

(5) A public facilities
district shall constitute a body corporate and shall possess all the usual
powers of a corporation for public purposes as well as all other powers that
may now or hereafter be specifically conferred by statute, including, but not
limited to, the authority to hire employees, staff, and services, to enter into
contracts, and to sue and be sued.

(6) The county
legislative authority or the city council may transfer property to the public
facilities district created under this chapter. No property that is encumbered
with debt or that is in need of major capital renovation may be transferred to
the district without the agreement of the district and revenues adequate to
retire the existing indebtedness.

Sec. 9. RCW 36.100.030 and 1999
c 165 s 16 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) A public facilities
district, subject to any limitations set forth in the resolution providing
for its creation, is authorized to acquire, construct, own, remodel,
maintain, equip, reequip, repair, and operate sports facilities, entertainment
facilities, convention facilities, or ((regional centers)) public
facilities as defined in RCW 35.57.020, together with contiguous parking
facilities. The taxes that are provided for in this chapter may only be
imposed for these purposes.

(2) A public facilities
district may enter into agreements under chapter 39.34 RCW for the joint
provision and operation of such facilities and may enter into contracts under
chapter 39.34 RCW where any party to the contract provides and operates such
facilities for the other party or parties to the contract.

(3) A public
facilities district created under RCW 36.100.010 and a public facilities
district created under RCW 35.57.010 located in the same county are authorized
to enter into agreements under chapter 39.34 RCW to jointly acquire, construct,
own, remodel, maintain, equip, reequip, repair, finance, and operate one or
more public facilities as defined under RCW 35.57.020.

(4)
Notwithstanding the establishment of a career, civil, or merit service system,
a public ((facility [facilities])) facilities district may
contract with a public or private entity for the operation or management of its
public facilities.

(((4))) (5)
A public facilities district is authorized to use the supplemental alternative
public works contracting procedures set forth in chapter 39.10 RCW in
connection with the design, construction, reconstruction, remodel, or
alteration of any of its public facilities.

(((5))) (6)
A public facilities district may impose charges and fees for the use of its
facilities, and may accept and expend or use gifts, grants, and donations.

Sec. 10. RCW 36.100.060 and 1999
c 165 s 15 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) To carry out the
purpose of this chapter, a public facilities district may issue general obligation
bonds, not to exceed an amount, together with any outstanding nonvoter approved
general obligation indebtedness, equal to one-half of one percent of the value
of taxable property within the district, as the term "value of taxable
property" is defined in RCW 39.36.015. A facilities district additionally
may issue general obligation bonds for capital purposes only, together with any
outstanding general obligation indebtedness, not to exceed an amount equal to
one and one-fourth percent of the value of the taxable property within the
district, as the term "value of taxable property" is defined in RCW
39.36.015, when authorized by the voters of the public facilities district
pursuant to Article VIII, section 6 of the state Constitution, and to provide for
the retirement thereof by excess property tax levies as provided in this
chapter.

(2) General obligation
bonds may be issued with a maturity of up to thirty years, and shall be issued
and sold in accordance with the provisions of chapter 39.46 RCW.

(3) The general
obligation bonds may be payable from the operating revenues of the public
facilities district in addition to the tax receipts of the district.

(4) The excise tax
imposed pursuant to RCW 36.100.040 shall terminate upon final payment of all bonded
indebtedness for its public facilities, except that the excise tax may be
reauthorized by a public vote, in the same manner as originally authorized, for
funding of additional ((public)) facilities ((or a regional center)),
including a public facility as defined in RCW 35.57.020.

Sec. 11. RCW 36.100.210 and 1999
c 165 s 17 are each amended to read as follows:

A public facility
district may levy and fix a tax of not more than one cent on twenty cents or
fraction thereof to be paid by the person who pays an admission charge to a ((regional
center)) public facility, as defined in RCW 35.57.020. This
includes a tax on persons who are admitted free of charge or at reduced rates
if other persons pay a charge or a regular higher charge for the same
privileges or accommodations.

The term
"admission charge" includes:

(1) A charge made for
season tickets or subscriptions;

(2) A cover charge, or
a charge made for use of seats and tables reserved or otherwise, and other
similar accommodations;

(3) A charge made for
food and refreshment if free entertainment, recreation, or amusement is
provided;

(4) A charge made for
rental or use of equipment or facilities for purposes of recreation or
amusement; if the rental of the equipment or facilities is necessary to the
enjoyment of a privilege for which a general admission is charged, the combined
charges shall be considered as the admission charge;

(5) ((Automobile))
Motor vehicle parking charges if the amount of the charge is determined
according to the number of passengers in the ((automobile)) motor
vehicle.

Sec. 12. RCW 36.100.220 and 1999
c 165 s 18 are each amended to read as follows:

A public facility
district may levy and fix a tax on any vehicle parking charges imposed at any
parking facility that is owned or leased by the public facility district as
part of a ((regional center)) public facility, as defined in RCW
35.57.020. No county or city or town within which the ((regional center))
public facility, as defined in RCW 35.57.020, is located may impose a
tax of the same or similar kind on any vehicle parking charges at the
facility. For the purposes of this section, "vehicle parking
charges" means only the actual parking charges exclusive of taxes and
service charges and the value of any other benefit conferred. The tax
authorized under this section shall be at the rate of not more than ten
percent.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
13. A new section is added
to chapter 36.100 RCW to read as follows:

(1) A public facilities
district may apply for deferral of taxes on site preparation, construction of
buildings or other structures, and acquisition of related machinery and
equipment, for a public facility. Application shall be made to the department
of revenue in a form and manner prescribed by the department of revenue. The
application shall contain information regarding the location of the public
facility, estimated or actual costs, time schedules for completion and
operation, and other information required by the department of revenue. The
department of revenue shall approve the application within sixty days if it
meets the requirements of this section.

(2) The department of
revenue shall issue a sales and use tax deferral certificate for state and
local sales and use taxes due under chapters 82.08, 82.12, and 82.14 RCW on the
public facility. The use of the certificate shall be governed by rules
established by the department of revenue.

(3) The public
facilities district shall begin paying the deferred taxes in the fifth year
after the date certified by the department of revenue as the date on which the
public facility is operationally complete. The first payment is due on
December 31st of the fifth calendar year after such certified date, with
subsequent annual payments due on December 31st of the following nine years.
Each payment shall equal ten percent of the deferred tax.

(4) The department of
revenue may authorize an accelerated repayment schedule upon request of the
public facilities district.

(5) Interest shall not
be charged on any taxes deferred under this section for the period of deferral,
although all other penalties and interest applicable to delinquent excise taxes
may be assessed and imposed for delinquent payments under this section. The
debt for deferred taxes is not extinguished by insolvency or other failure of
the public facilities district.

(6)
Applications and any other information received by the department of revenue
under this section are not confidential and are subject to disclosure. Chapter
82.32 RCW applies to the administration of this section.

Sec. 14. RCW 82.14.390 and 1999 c
165 s 13 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) Except as provided
in subsection (6) of this section, the governing body of a public facilities
district created under chapter 35.57 or 36.100 RCW that commences construction
of a new ((regional center)) public facility, or improvement or
rehabilitation of an existing new ((regional center)) public facility,
before January 1, ((2003)) 2005, may impose a sales and use tax
in accordance with the terms of this chapter. The tax is in addition to other
taxes authorized by law and shall be collected from those persons who are
taxable by the state under chapters 82.08 and 82.12 RCW upon the occurrence of
any taxable event within the public facilities district. The rate of tax shall
not exceed 0.033 percent of the selling price in the case of a sales tax or
value of the article used in the case of a use tax.

(2) The tax imposed
under subsection (1) of this section shall be deducted from the amount of tax
otherwise required to be collected or paid over to the department of revenue
under chapter 82.08 or 82.12 RCW. The department of revenue shall perform the
collection of such taxes on behalf of the county at no cost to the public
facilities district.

(3) No tax may be
collected under this section before August 1, 2000. The tax imposed in this
section shall expire when the bonds issued for the construction of the ((regional
center)) public facility and related parking facilities are retired,
but not more than twenty-five years after the tax is first collected.

(4) Moneys collected
under this section shall only be used for the purposes set forth in RCW
35.57.020 and must be matched with an amount from other public or private
sources equal to thirty-three percent of the amount collected under this
section, provided that amounts generated from nonvoter approved taxes
authorized under chapter 35.57 RCW or nonvoter approved taxes authorized under
chapter 36.100 RCW shall not constitute a public or private source. For the
purpose of this section, public or private sources includes, but is not limited
to cash or in-kind contributions used in all phases of the development or
improvement of the ((regional center)) public facility, land that
is donated and used for the siting of the ((regional center)) public
facility, cash or in-kind contributions from public or private foundations,
or amounts attributed to private sector partners as part of a public and
private partnership agreement negotiated by the public facilities district.

(5) The combined total
tax levied under this section shall not be greater than 0.033 percent regardless
of the number of public facilities districts imposing such tax. If both a
public facilities district created under chapter 35.57 RCW and a public
facilities district created under chapter 36.100 RCW impose a tax under this
section, the tax imposed by a public facilities district created under chapter
35.57 RCW shall be credited against the tax imposed by ((a)) any
public facilities district created under chapter 36.100 RCW.

(6) A public facilities
district created under chapter 36.100 RCW is not eligible to impose the tax
under this section if the legislative authority of the county where the public
facilities district is located has imposed a sales and use tax under RCW
82.14.0485 or 82.14.0494.

(7) As
used in this section, "public facility" has the same meaning as in
RCW 35.57.020.

---
END ---