BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF
WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec.
1. The legislature finds
that potential geothermal energy has remained largely undeveloped in the
Cascade mountains. It is in the best interest of the state of Washington and
its residents to develop this resource where there are not significant environmental
issues. The legislature further finds that most of this potential rests on
United States forest service lands and that it has been very reluctant for two
decades to process geothermal leases.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
2. The Washington State
University energy program shall actively engage the United States forest
service to eliminate barriers to geothermal energy and to resolve issues.

Sec. 3. RCW 43.140.900 and 1991
c 76 s 1 are each amended to read as follows:

This
chapter shall terminate on June 30, ((2001)) 2011.

---
END ---