BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF
WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1. RCW 28A.225.225 and 1999
c 198 s 2 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) A district shall
accept applications from nonresident students who are the children of full-time
certificated and classified school employees, and those children shall be
permitted to enroll:

(a) At the school to
which the employee is assigned; or

(b) At a school
forming the district's K through 12 continuum which includes the school to
which the employee is assigned.

(2) A district may
reject applications under this section if:

(a) The student's
disciplinary records indicate a history of convictions for offenses or crimes,
violent or disruptive behavior, or gang membership; or

(b) The student has
been expelled or suspended from a public school for more than ten consecutive
days. Any policy allowing for readmission of expelled or suspended students
under this subsection (2)(b) must apply uniformly to both resident and
nonresident applicants.

(3) Except as
provided in subsection (1) of this section, all districts accepting
applications from nonresident students or from students receiving home-based
instruction for admission to the district's schools shall consider equally all
applications received. Each school district shall adopt a policy establishing
rational, fair, and equitable standards for acceptance and rejection of
applications by June 30, 1990. The policy may include rejection of a
nonresident student if:

(a) Acceptance of a
nonresident student would result in the district experiencing a financial
hardship;

(b) The student's
disciplinary records indicate a history of convictions for offenses or crimes,
violent or disruptive behavior, or gang membership; or

(c) The student has
been expelled or suspended from a public school for more than ten consecutive
days. Any policy allowing for readmission of expelled or suspended students
under this subsection (((1))) (3)(c) must apply uniformly to both
resident and nonresident applicants.

For purposes of
subsections (((1))) (2)(a) and (3)(b) of this section,
"gang" means a group which: (i) Consists of three or more persons;
(ii) has identifiable leadership; and (iii) on an ongoing basis, regularly
conspires and acts in concert mainly for criminal purposes.

(((2))) (4)
The district shall provide to applicants written notification of the approval
or denial of the application in a timely manner. If the application is
rejected, the notification shall include the reason or reasons for denial and
the right to appeal under RCW 28A.225.230(3).

Sec. 2. RCW 28A.225.270 and 1990
1st ex.s. c 9 s 205 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) Each school
district in the state shall adopt and implement a policy allowing intradistrict
enrollment options no later than June 30, 1990. Each district shall establish
its own policy establishing standards on how the intradistrict enrollment
options will be implemented.

(2) A district shall
permit the children of full-time certificated and classified school employees
to enroll at:

(a) The school to
which the employee is assigned; or

(b) A school forming
the district's K through 12 continuum which includes the school to which the
employee is assigned.

(3) For
the purposes of this section, "full-time employees" means employees
who are employed for the full number of hours and days for their job
description.

---
END ---