BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF
WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1. RCW 84.36.040 and 1989 c
379 s 1 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) The real and personal
property used by nonprofit (a) day care centers as defined pursuant to RCW
74.15.020; (b) free public libraries; (c) orphanages and orphan asylums; (d)
homes for the sick or infirm; (e) hospitals for the sick; and (f) outpatient
dialysis facilities, which are used for the purposes of such organizations
shall be exempt from taxation: PROVIDED, That the benefit of the exemption
inures to the user.

(2) The real and
personal property leased to and used by a hospital, owned and operated by a
public hospital district established under chapter 70.44 RCW, for hospital
purposes is exempt from taxation. The benefit of the exemption must inure to
the user.

(3) To be exempt
under this section, the property must be used exclusively for the purposes for
which exemption is granted, except as provided in RCW 84.36.805.

Sec. 2. RCW 84.36.050 and 1984 c
220 s 5 are each amended to read as follows:

The following property
((shall be)) is exempt from taxation:

(1) Property
owned or used for any nonprofit school or college in this state for educational
purposes or cultural or art educational programs as defined in RCW 82.04.4328.
Real property so exempt shall not exceed four hundred acres in extent and,
except as provided in RCW 84.36.805, shall be used exclusively for college or
campus purposes including but not limited to, buildings and grounds designed
for the educational, athletic, or social programs of ((said)) the
institution, the housing of students, the housing of religious faculty, the
housing of the chief administrator, athletic buildings and all other school or
college facilities, the need for which would be nonexistent but for the
presence of ((such)) the school or college and which are
principally designed to further the educational functions of ((such)) the
college or schools. If the property is leased, the benefit of the exemption ((shall))
must inure to the user;

(2) Real or personal
property owned by a not-for-profit foundation that is established for the
exclusive support of an institution of higher education, as defined in RCW
28B.10.016. The property is exempt if it is leased to and used by the
institution exclusively for college or campus purposes and is principally
designed to further the educational functions of the institution. The
exemption is only available for property actively utilized by currently
enrolled students. The benefit of the exemption must inure to the user.

Sec. 3. RCW 84.36.810 and 1999 c
203 s 3 and 1999 c 139 s 4 are each reenacted and amended to read as follows:

(1)(a) Upon
cessation of a use under which an exemption has been granted pursuant to RCW
84.36.030, 84.36.037, 84.36.040, 84.36.041, 84.36.042, 84.36.043, 84.36.046,
84.36.050, 84.36.060, 84.36.550, 84.36.560, and 84.36.570, except as
provided in (b) of this subsection, the county treasurer shall collect all
taxes which would have been paid had the property not been exempt during the
three years preceding, or the life of such exemption, if such be less, together
with the interest at the same rate and computed in the same way as that upon
delinquent property taxes. If the property has been granted an exemption for
more than ten consecutive years, taxes and interest shall not be assessed under
this section.

(b) Upon cessation
of use by an institution of higher education of property exempt under RCW
84.36.050(2) the county treasurer shall collect all taxes which would have been
paid had the property not been exempt during the seven years preceding, or the
life of the exemption, whichever is less.

(2) Subsection (1) of
this section applies only when ownership of the property is transferred or when
fifty-one percent or more of the area of the property loses its exempt status.
The additional tax under subsection (1) of this section shall not be imposed if
the cessation of use resulted solely from:

(a) Transfer to a
nonprofit organization, association, or corporation for a use which also
qualifies and is granted exemption under this chapter;

(b) A taking through
the exercise of the power of eminent domain, or sale or transfer to an entity
having the power of eminent domain in anticipation of the exercise of such
power;

(c) Official action by
an agency of the state of Washington or by the county or city within which the
property is located which disallows the present use of such property;

(d) A natural disaster
such as a flood, windstorm, earthquake, or other such calamity rather than by
virtue of the act of the organization, association, or corporation changing the
use of such property;

(e) Relocation of the
activity and use of another location or site except for undeveloped properties
of camp facilities exempted under RCW 84.36.030;

(f) Cancellation of a
lease on leased property that had been exempt under this chapter or RCW
84.36.560; or

(g) A change in the
exempt portion of a home for the aging under RCW 84.36.041(3), as long as some
portion of the home remains exempt.

(3) Subsections
(2)(e) and (f) of this section do not apply to property leased to a state
institution of higher education and exempt under RCW 84.36.050(2).

Sec. 4. RCW 84.36.815 and 1998 c
311 s 27 are each amended to read as follows:

In order to qualify for
exempt status for any real or personal property under this chapter except
personal property under RCW 84.36.600, all foreign national governments((,));
cemeteries((,)); nongovernmental nonprofit corporations,
organizations, and associations((,)); hospitals owned and operated by
a public hospital district for purposes of exemption under RCW 84.36.040(2);
and soil and water conservation districts shall file an initial application on
or before March 31 with the state department of revenue. All applications
shall be filed on forms prescribed by the department and shall be signed by an
authorized agent of the applicant.

In order to requalify
for exempt status, all applicants except nonprofit cemeteries shall file an
annual renewal declaration on or before March 31 each year. The renewal declaration
shall be on forms prescribed by the department of revenue and shall contain an
affidavit certifying the exempt status of the real or personal property owned
by the exempt organization. When an organization acquires real property
qualified for exemption or converts real property to exempt status, such
organization shall file an initial application for the property within sixty
days following the acquisition or conversion. If the application is filed
after the expiration of the sixty-day period a late filing penalty shall be
imposed pursuant to RCW 84.36.825, as now or hereafter amended.

When organizations
acquire real property qualified for exemption or convert real property to an
exempt use, the property, upon approval of the application for exemption, is
entitled to a property tax exemption for property taxes due and payable the
following year. If the owner has paid taxes for the year following the year
the property qualified for exemption, the owner is entitled to a refund of the
amount paid on the property so acquired or converted.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 5. This act applies to taxes
levied for collection in 2002 and thereafter.

---
END ---