BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF
WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec.
1. A new section is added
to chapter 48.43 RCW to read as follows:

(1) The definitions in
this subsection apply throughout this section unless the context clearly
requires otherwise.

(a) "Health
carrier" includes: Insuring entities listed in RCW 48.43.005(17); the
state health insurance pool operating under chapter 48.41 RCW; fraternal
benefit societies under chapter 48.36A RCW; health plans operating under the
health care authority under chapter 41.05 RCW; managed health care systems
operating under the basic health plan under chapter 70.47 RCW; and managed
health care systems contracting with the department of social and health
services under chapter 74.09 RCW.

(b) "Health
plan" has the same meaning as defined in RCW 48.43.005.

(c) "Outpatient
contraceptive services" means services necessary for the effective use of
contraception, including family planning consultations, examinations,
procedures for inserting, removing, or dispensing prescription contraceptive
methods, and laboratory services provided on an outpatient basis and related to
the use of contraceptive methods, including natural family planning.

(d) "Prescription
contraceptive drugs and devices" means all prescription contraceptive
drugs and devices approved by the United States food and drug administration.

(2) Every health
carrier offering, issuing, or renewing a health plan on or after July 1, 2001,
that provides coverage for prescription drugs must provide coverage for all
prescription contraceptive drugs and devices approved by the United States food
and drug administration.

(3) Every health
carrier offering, issuing, or renewing a health plan on or after July 1, 2001,
that provides coverage for outpatient services must provide coverage for all
outpatient contraceptive services.

(4) Health carriers may
not impose upon enrollees receiving prescription contraceptive drugs and
devices or outpatient contraceptive services any:

(a) Copayment,
coinsurance payment, or fee that is not equally imposed upon all individuals in
the same benefit category, class, coinsurance level, or copayment level,
receiving benefits for prescription drugs and outpatient services; or

(b) Reduction in
allowable reimbursement for prescription drug benefits and outpatient services.

(5) This section does
not prohibit health carriers from:

(a) Using generic
equivalent drugs approved by the United States food and drug administration,
whenever medically appropriate. When a brand name drug is requested by an
enrollee and a generic equivalent is medically appropriate, this section may
not be construed to prohibit a health carrier from requiring the enrollee to
pay a deductible, coinsurance, or copayment consistent with subsection (4) of
this section, in addition to the difference of the cost of the brand name drug,
less the maximum covered amount of the generic equivalent; or

(b) Excluding
nonprescription drugs and devices, or using closed formularies. However, the
formularies must include all prescription contraceptive drugs and devices
approved by the United States food and drug administration.

(6) Nothing in this
section requires coverage for:

(a) Prescription
contraceptive drugs and devices in any contract, policy, or health plan that
does not otherwise provide coverage for prescription drugs; or

(b) Outpatient contraceptive
services in any contract, policy, or health plan that does not otherwise
provide coverage for outpatient services.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
2. A new section is added
to chapter 48.41 RCW to read as follows:

Health plans offered or
issued under this chapter by the state health insurance pool providing coverage
for prescription contraceptive drugs and devices or outpatient contraceptive
services are subject to the provisions of section 1 of this act.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
3. A new section is added
to chapter 48.36A RCW to read as follows:

Benefit contracts
offered or issued under this chapter providing coverage for prescription
contraceptive drugs and devices or outpatient contraceptive services are
subject to the provisions of section 1 of this act.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
4. A new section is added
to chapter 74.09 RCW to read as follows:

Managed health care
systems providing coverage for prescription contraceptive drugs and devices or
outpatient contraceptive services under this chapter are subject to the
provisions of section 1 of this act.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
5. A new section is added
to chapter 41.05 RCW to read as follows:

Health plans offered or
issued under this chapter providing coverage for prescription contraceptive
drugs and devices or outpatient contraceptive services are subject to the
provisions of section 1 of this act.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
6. A new section is added
to chapter 70.47 RCW to read as follows:

Managed health care
systems providing coverage for prescription contraceptive drugs and devices or
outpatient contraceptive services under this chapter are subject to the provisions
of section 1 of this act.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
7. If any provision of this
act or its application to any person or circumstance is held invalid, the
remainder of the act or the application of the provision to other persons or
circumstances is not affected.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 8. This act is necessary for
the immediate preservation of the public peace, health, or safety, or support
of the state government and its existing public institutions, and takes effect
immediately.

---
END ---