BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF
WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec.
1. The legislature intends
to promote public trust in its laws, accountability in governance, and lowest
cost financing for public infrastructure projects. The state supreme court has
ruled unanimously that the exclusive authority to impose tolls on the existing
Tacoma Narrows bridge rests with the state. The supreme court also ruled that
state law requires that typical operations, maintenance, repair, and upkeep of
that bridge be paid from statewide transportation revenues. The legislature
intends to adhere to this statutory scheme for the imposition of tolls to the
greatest extent possible, while still responding to the compelling public need
for construction and operation of bridges across the Tacoma Narrows.

Furthermore, whereas
the supreme court has ruled that the provisions of chapter 47.46 RCW are constitutional,
the legislature intends to use all relevant provisions of the agreement
developed under that chapter that were not otherwise invalidated by the supreme
court, including but not limited to the selection of the design-build
contractor for the Tacoma Narrows bridge toll project and the negotiated fixed
price for all design, engineering, and construction.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
2. The state transportation
commission, in its lawful capacity as the state's toll bridge authority, may
impose tolls consistent with this chapter and, if necessary or desirable,
chapter 47.58 RCW, for projects that have been selected and developed under
chapter 47.46 RCW.

Sec. 3. RCW 47.56.040 and 1984 c
7 s 248 are each amended to read as follows:

The
department is empowered, in accordance with the provisions of this chapter or
under chapter 47.46 RCW, to provide for the establishment and construction
of toll bridges upon any public highways of this state together with approaches
thereto wherever it is considered necessary or advantageous and practicable for
crossing any stream, body of water, gulch, navigable water, swamp, or other
topographical formation whether that formation is within this state or constitutes
a boundary between this state and an adjoining state or country. The necessity
or advantage and practicability of any such toll bridge shall be determined by
the department, and the feasibility of financing any toll bridge in the manner
provided by this chapter shall be a primary consideration and determined
according to the best judgment of the department. For the purpose of obtaining
information for the consideration of the department upon the construction of
any toll bridge or any other matters pertaining thereto, any cognizant officer
or employee of the state shall, upon the request of the department, make
reasonable examination, investigation, survey, or reconnaissance for the
determination of material facts pertaining thereto and report this to the
department. The cost of any such examination, investigation, survey, or
reconnaissance shall be borne by the department or office conducting these
activities from the funds provided for that department or office for its usual
functions.

Sec. 4. RCW 47.56.240 and 1984 c
7 s 265 are each amended to read as follows:

The
commission is hereby empowered to fix the rates of toll and other charges for
all toll bridges built under the terms of this chapter or developed under
chapter 47.46 RCW. Toll charges so fixed may be changed from time to time
as conditions warrant. The commission, in establishing toll charges, shall
give due consideration to the cost of operating and maintaining such toll
bridge or toll bridges including the cost of insurance, and to the amount
required annually to meet the redemption of bonds and interest payments on
them. The tolls and charges shall be at all times fixed at rates to yield
annual revenue equal to any required annual operating and maintenance
expenses including insurance costs and all redemption payments and interest
charges of the bonds issued for any particular toll bridge or toll bridges as
the bonds become due. The bond redemption and interest payments constitute a
first direct and exclusive charge and lien on all such tolls and other revenues
and interest thereon. Sinking funds created therefrom received from the use
and operation of the toll bridge or toll bridges, and such tolls and revenues
together with the interest earned thereon shall constitute a trust fund for the
security and payment of such bonds and shall not be used or pledged for any
other purpose as long as any of these bonds are outstanding and unpaid.

Sec. 5. RCW 47.56.245 and 1984 c
7 s 267 are each amended to read as follows:

The ((department))
commission shall retain toll charges on all existing and future
facilities until all costs of investigation, financing, acquisition of
property, and construction advanced from the motor vehicle fund, and
obligations incurred under RCW 47.56.250 and chapter 16, Laws of 1945 have been
fully paid. With respect to every facility completed after March 19, 1953,
costs of maintenance, management, and operation ((shall)) may be
paid periodically out of the revenues of the facility in which such costs were
incurred.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
6. Toll revenues generated
from any facility developed under chapter 47.46 RCW after January 1, 2001, may
be used for costs necessary or incident to operation of the toll facilities,
including maintenance and preservation of the facilities.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
7. Pursuant to RCW
43.135.055, the legislature authorizes the transportation commission to
increase bridge tolls in excess of the fiscal growth factor.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
8. The issuance, sale, and
retirement of bonds authorized in RCW 47.10.843 through 47.10.848 (Referendum
49 bonds), is under the supervision and control of the state finance committee,
which, upon request of the department of transportation shall provide for the
issuance, sale, and retirement of coupon or registered bonds to be dated,
issued, and sold from time to time in such amounts as the department of transportation
determines to be necessary to meet the purposes specified in this chapter.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
9. Money arising from the
sale of bonds under RCW 47.10.843 through 47.10.848 for the purposes authorized
under section 1 of this act must be deposited in the state treasury to the
credit of the Tacoma Narrows toll bridge account created in section 10 of this
act. Those funds are available only for the purposes enumerated in this
chapter, for payment of the expense incurred in the issuance and sale of any
such bonds, and to repay the motor vehicle fund for any sums advanced to pay
the cost of surveys, location, design, right-of-way, and all other things
necessary for the construction of the bridge and its approaches.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
10. A special account to be
known as the Tacoma Narrows toll bridge account is created in the motor vehicle
fund in the state treasury. Any capitalized interest from the proceeds of the
bonds authorized under RCW 47.10.843, and at least monthly all of the tolls and
other revenues received from the operation of the toll bridge and from any
interest that may be earned from the deposit or investment of these revenues
after the payment of costs of operation, maintenance, management, and necessary
repairs of the facility must be deposited into this account.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
11. All tolls or other
revenues received from the operation of the Tacoma Narrows toll bridge
constructed with the proceeds of bonds issued and sold under RCW 47.10.843
through 47.10.848 must be paid by the department to the state treasurer, who
shall deposit them as demand deposits in a depositary or depositaries
authorized by law to receive deposits of state funds, to the credit of the
Tacoma Narrows toll bridge account.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
12. Tolls must remain on the
facility for a length of time necessary to repay the motor vehicle fund for any
amounts expended on the design, development, construction, maintenance, repair,
or operation of the Tacoma Narrows toll bridge project. Funds specifically
appropriated as a state financial contribution to the project do not require
repayment.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
13. A new section is added
to chapter 47.46 RCW to read as follows:

RCW 47.46.010
authorizes private entities to undertake either all or a portion of the study,
planning, design, development, financing, acquisition, installation,
construction or improvement, operation, and maintenance of transportation
projects developed under the public-private initiative program. RCW
47.46.040(4) authorizes the state to exercise any power it possesses to
facilitate the development of the project, including any powers related to
financing and operation. While still upholding the constitutionality of this
chapter, the state supreme court unanimously held that the contractual method
proposed for a private entity to impose tolls on the existing Tacoma Narrows
bridge, as well as proposed uses of the toll revenues, violate state law.
Therefore, the legislature intends to rely upon existing state laws to provide
a public toll authority and public financing, while allowing the remainder of
the project proposed under this chapter to proceed.

Sec. 14. RCW 47.46.050 and 1995
2nd sp.s. c 19 s 4 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) The department may
enter into agreements using federal, state, and local financing in connection
with the projects, including without limitation, grants, loans, and other
measures authorized by section 1012 of ISTEA, and to do such things as
necessary and desirable to maximize the funding and financing, including the
formation of a revolving loan fund to implement this section.

(2) Agreements entered
into under this section ((shall)) may authorize the private
entity to lease the facilities within a designated area or areas from the state
and to impose user fees or tolls within the designated area to allow a
reasonable rate of return on investment, as established through a negotiated
agreement between the state and the private entity. The negotiated agreement
shall determine a maximum rate of return on investment, based on project
characteristics. If the negotiated rate of return on investment is not
affected, the private entity may establish and modify toll rates and user fees.

(3) Agreements may
establish "incentive" rates of return beyond the negotiated maximum
rate of return on investment. The incentive rates of return shall be designed
to provide financial benefits to the affected public jurisdictions and the
private entity, given the attainment of various safety, performance, or
transportation demand management goals. The incentive rates of return shall be
negotiated in the agreement.

(4) Agreements ((shall))
may require that over the term of the ownership or lease the user fees
or toll revenues be applied only to payment of the ((private entity's))
capital outlay costs for the project, including project development costs,
interest expense, the costs associated with design, construction, operations,
toll collection, maintenance and administration of the project, reimbursement
to the state for all costs associated with an election as required under RCW
47.46.030, the costs of project review and oversight, technical and law
enforcement services, establishment of a fund to assure the adequacy of
maintenance expenditures, and a reasonable return on investment to the private
entity. A negotiated agreement shall not extend the term of the ownership or
lease beyond the period of time required for payment of the private entity's
capital outlay costs for the project under this subsection.

Sec. 15. RCW 47.46.060 and 1998 c
179 s 4 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) Either the
department of transportation or a private entity that is party to an
agreement under this chapter may apply for deferral of taxes on the site
preparation for, the construction of, the acquisition of any related machinery
and equipment which will become a part of, and the rental of equipment for use
in the state route number 16 corridor improvements project under this chapter.
Application shall be made to the department of revenue in a form and manner
prescribed by the department of revenue. The application shall contain
information regarding estimated or actual costs, time schedules for completion
and operation, and other information required by the department of revenue.
The department of revenue shall approve the application within sixty days if it
meets the requirements of this section.

(2) The department of
revenue shall issue a sales and use tax deferral certificate for state and
local sales and use taxes due under chapters 82.08, 82.12, and 82.14 RCW on the
project. The use of the certificate shall be governed by rules established by
the department of revenue.

(3) The department
of transportation or a private entity granted a tax deferral under this
section shall begin paying the deferred taxes in the fifth year after the date
certified by the department of revenue as the date on which the project is
operationally complete. The first payment is due on December 31st of the fifth
calendar year after such certified date, with subsequent annual payments due on
December 31st of the following nine years. Each payment shall equal ten
percent of the deferred tax.

(4) The department of
revenue or the department of transportation may authorize an accelerated
repayment schedule upon request of a private entity granted a deferral under
this section.

(5) Interest shall not
be charged on any taxes deferred under this section for the period of deferral,
although all other penalties and interest applicable to delinquent excise taxes
may be assessed and imposed for delinquent payments under this section. The
debt for deferred taxes is not extinguished by insolvency or other failure of the
private entity.

(6) Applications and
any other information received by the department of revenue under this section
are not confidential and are subject to disclosure. Chapter 82.32 RCW applies
to the administration of this section.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
16. RCW 47.56.271 (Tacoma Narrows
bridge--Toll free facility) and 1983 c 3 s 130 & 1965 c 50 s 1 are each
repealed.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
17. Sections 1, 2, and 6
through 12 of this act are added to chapter 47.56 RCW.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 18. This act is necessary for
the immediate preservation of the public peace, health, or safety, or support
of the state government and its existing public institutions, and takes effect
immediately.

---
END ---