BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF
WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1. RCW 28A.150.250 and 1990
c 33 s 107 are each amended to read as follows:

From those funds made
available by the legislature for the current use of the common schools, the
superintendent of public instruction shall distribute annually as provided in
RCW 28A.510.250 to each school district of the state operating a program approved
by the state board of education an amount which((, when combined with an
appropriate portion of such locally available revenues, other than receipts
from federal forest revenues distributed to school districts pursuant to RCW
28A.520.010 and 28A.520.020, as the superintendent of public instruction may
deem appropriate for consideration in computing state equalization support,
excluding excess property tax levies,)) will constitute a basic education
allocation in dollars for each annual average full time equivalent student
enrolled, based upon one full school year of one hundred eighty days, except
that for kindergartens one full school year shall be one hundred eighty half
days of instruction, or the equivalent as provided in RCW 28A.150.220.

Basic education shall
be considered to be fully funded by those amounts of dollars appropriated by
the legislature pursuant to RCW 28A.150.250 and 28A.150.260 to fund those program
requirements identified in RCW 28A.150.220 in accordance with the formula and
ratios provided in RCW 28A.150.260 and those amounts of dollars appropriated by
the legislature to fund the salary requirements of RCW 28A.150.100 and
28A.150.410.

Operation of a program
approved by the state board of education, for the purposes of this section,
shall include a finding that the ratio of students per classroom teacher in
grades kindergarten through three is not greater than the ratio of students per
classroom teacher in grades four and above for such district: PROVIDED, That
for the purposes of this section, "classroom teacher" shall be
defined as an instructional employee possessing at least a provisional
certificate, but not necessarily employed as a certificated employee, whose
primary duty is the daily educational instruction of students: PROVIDED
FURTHER, That the state board of education shall adopt rules and regulations to
insure compliance with the student/teacher ratio provisions of this section, and
such rules and regulations shall allow for exemptions for those special
programs and/or school districts which may be deemed unable to practicably meet
the student/teacher ratio requirements of this section by virtue of a small
number of students.

If a school district's
basic education program fails to meet the basic education requirements
enumerated in RCW 28A.150.250, 28A.150.260, and 28A.150.220, the state board of
education shall require the superintendent of public instruction to withhold
state funds in whole or in part for the basic education allocation until
program compliance is assured: PROVIDED, That the state board of education may
waive this requirement in the event of substantial lack of classroom space.

Sec. 2. RCW 76.12.120 and 2000 c
148 s 2 are each amended to read as follows:

Except as provided in
RCW 76.12.125, all land, acquired or designated by the department as state
forest land, shall be forever reserved from sale, but the timber and other
products thereon may be sold or the land may be leased in the same manner and
for the same purposes as is authorized for state granted land if the department
finds such sale or lease to be in the best interests of the state and approves
the terms and conditions thereof.

Except as provided in
RCW 79.12.035, all money derived from the sale of timber or other products, or
from lease, or from any other source from the land, except where the
Constitution of this state or RCW 76.12.030 requires other disposition, shall
be disposed of as follows:

(1) Fifty percent shall
be placed in the forest development account.

(2) Fifty
percent shall be prorated and distributed to the state general fund, to be
dedicated for the benefit of the public schools, and the county in which the
land is located according to the relative proportions of tax levies of all
taxing districts in the county. The portion to be distributed to the state
general fund shall be based on the regular school levy rate under RCW 84.52.065
((as now or hereafter amended and the levy rate for any maintenance and
operation special school levies)). With regard to the portion to be
distributed to the counties, the department shall certify to the state
treasurer the amounts to be distributed within seven working days of receipt of
the money. The state treasurer shall distribute funds to the counties four
times per month, with no more than ten days between each payment date. The
money distributed to the county shall be paid, distributed, and prorated to the
various other funds in the same manner as general taxes are paid and
distributed during the year of payment.

---
END ---