BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF
WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1. RCW 77.15.190 and 1999 c
258 s 9 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) A person is guilty
of unlawful trapping if the person:

(a) Sets out traps that
are capable of taking wild animals, game animals, or furbearing mammals and
does not possess all licenses, tags, or permits required under this title;

(b) Violates any rule
of the commission or director regarding seasons, bag or possession limits,
closed areas including game reserves, closed times, or any other rule governing
the trapping of wild animals; or

(c) Fails to identify
the owner of the traps or devices by neither (i) attaching a metal tag with the
owner's department-assigned identification number or the name and address of
the trapper legibly written in numbers or letters not less than one-eighth inch
in height nor (ii) inscribing into the metal of the trap such number or name
and address.

(2) Trapping a
common rat, mouse, or mole is not unlawful trapping.

(3)
Unlawful trapping is a misdemeanor.

--- END ---