BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF
WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec.
1. As the disparity in the
cost-of-living among community and technical college districts across the state
has grown in recent years, the purchasing power of equalized salaries has
become more disparate for employees of community and technical colleges. A
major contributor to these costs is housing. The purpose of this act is to
provide a housing allowance for community and technical college employees in
order to minimize disparities in purchasing power among community and
technical college employees across the state.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
2. A new section is added
to chapter 28B.50 RCW to read as follows:

(1) Community and
technical college districts shall provide a housing allowance for eligible
employees as provided for in this section.

(2) The housing
allowance shall be based on data reported for the most recent annual period for
which data are available for each biennium in which the housing allowance
amount is funded. The collection of data shall be done by a nationally
recognized entity that collects statistically valid housing cost data for federal
government agencies and businesses, selected by the superintendent of public
instruction and subject to approval by the legislative fiscal committees and
the office of financial management. The office of the superintendent of public
instruction shall contract with the entity selected under this subsection (2)
from funds provided for this purpose.

(3)(a) The cost of
housing shall be calculated for each school district in the state in accordance
with subsection (2) of this section.

(b) Except as provided
in (c) of this subsection, the median housing cost shall be based on data for
the school district in which the community and technical college district
administrative office is located.

(c) For community and
technical college districts containing a metropolitan area as defined in this
section, the cost of housing shall be calculated based on the metropolitan area
in which the community and technical college district administration is
located, not the location of the community and technical college district
administration.

(4)(a) Housing
allowances shall be available to community and technical college districts in
which the cost of housing as determined under subsection (3) of this section
exceeds the statewide median cost of housing based on a standard set of housing
specifications but not to exceed thirty percent of the median costs.

(b) Housing allowances
are not earnable compensation as defined in RCW 41.32.010 or compensation
earnable as defined in RCW 41.40.010.

(c) Housing allowances
shall be a subject of collective bargaining in each community and technical
college district in which housing allowances are available.

(5) The housing
allowance shall be paid only to actively employed eligible employees and is not
earnable compensation or compensation earnable for purposes of retirement
benefits.

(6) In the 2001-2003
biennium, the state shall allocate housing allowance funds for ten percent of
the full cost of housing allowances. In the 2003-2005 biennium the state shall
allocate twenty percent of the full cost of housing allowances. In the
2005-2007 biennium the state shall allocate forty percent of the full cost of
housing allowances. In the 2007-2009 biennium the state shall allocate eighty
percent of the full cost of housing allowances.

(7) The college board
shall administer the housing allowance program and shall adopt rules for
implementation. The college board shall allocate the housing allowance to
eligible community and technical college districts. The college board shall
arrange with the superintendent of public instruction to receive data obtained
under subsection (2) of this section.

(8) The definitions in
this subsection apply throughout this section.

(a) "Eligible
employees" means academic employees as defined in RCW 28B.52.020 and full
and part-time technical college classified employees subject to chapter 41.56
RCW.

(b) "Metropolitan
area" means an area of more than one city where the cities have adjoining
boundaries, within a single community and technical college district.

Sec. 3. RCW 28B.52.020 and 1991
c 238 s 146 are each amended to read as follows:

As used in this
chapter:

(1) "Employee
organization" means any organization which includes as members the
academic employees of a college district and which has as one of its purposes
the representation of the employees in their employment relations with the
college district.

(2) "Academic
employee" means any teacher, counselor, librarian, or department head, who
is employed by any college district, whether full or part time, with the
exception of the chief administrative officer of, and any administrator in,
each college district.

(3)
"Administrator" means any person employed either full or part time by
the college district and who performs administrative functions as at least
fifty percent or more of his or her assignments, and has responsibilities to
hire, dismiss, or discipline other employees. Administrators shall not be
members of the bargaining unit unless a majority of such administrators and a
majority of the bargaining unit elect by secret ballot for such inclusion
pursuant to rules as adopted in accordance with RCW 28B.52.080.

(4)
"Commission" means the public employment relations commission.

(5) "Unfair labor
practice" means any unfair labor practice listed in RCW 28B.52.073.

(6) "Union
security provision" means a provision in a collective bargaining agreement
under which some or all employees in the bargaining unit may be required, as a
condition of continued employment on or after the thirtieth day following the
beginning of such employment or the effective date of the provision, whichever
is later, to become a member of the exclusive bargaining representative or pay
an agency fee equal to the periodic dues and initiation fees uniformly required
as a condition of acquiring or retaining membership in the exclusive bargaining
representative.

(7) "Exclusive
bargaining representative" means any employee organization which has:

(a) Been certified or
recognized under this chapter as the representative of the employees in an
appropriate collective bargaining unit; or

(b) Before July 26,
1987, been certified or recognized under a predecessor statute as the representative
of the employees in a bargaining unit which continues to be appropriate under
this chapter.

(8) "Collective
bargaining" and "bargaining" mean the performance of the mutual
obligation of the representatives of the employer and the exclusive bargaining
representative to meet at reasonable times to bargain in good faith in an
effort to reach agreement with respect to wages, hours, and other terms and
conditions of employment, such as procedures related to housing allowances,
nonretention, dismissal, denial of tenure, and reduction in force. Prior law,
practice, or interpretation shall be neither restrictive, expansive, nor
determinative with respect to the scope of bargaining. A written contract
incorporating any agreements reached shall be executed if requested by either
party. The obligation to bargain does not compel either party to agree to a
proposal or to make a concession.

In the event of a
dispute between an employer and an exclusive bargaining representative over the
matters that are terms and conditions of employment, the commission shall
decide which items are mandatory subjects for bargaining.

Sec. 4. RCW 41.56.030 and 2000 c
23 s 1 and 2000 c 19 s 1 are each reenacted and amended to read as follows:

As used in this
chapter:

(1) "Public
employer" means any officer, board, commission, council, or other person
or body acting on behalf of any public body governed by this chapter, or any
subdivision of such public body. For the purposes of this section, the public
employer of district court or superior court employees for wage-related matters
is the respective county legislative authority, or person or body acting on
behalf of the legislative authority, and the public employer for
nonwage-related matters is the judge or judge's designee of the respective
district court or superior court.

(2) "Public
employee" means any employee of a public employer except any person (a)
elected by popular vote, or (b) appointed to office pursuant to statute,
ordinance or resolution for a specified term of office as a member of a
multimember board, commission, or committee, whether appointed by the executive
head or body of the public employer, or (c) whose duties as deputy,
administrative assistant or secretary necessarily imply a confidential
relationship to (i) the executive head or body of the applicable bargaining
unit, or (ii) any person elected by popular vote, or (iii) any person appointed
to office pursuant to statute, ordinance or resolution for a specified term of
office as a member of a multimember board, commission, or committee, whether
appointed by the executive head or body of the public employer, or (d) who is a
court commissioner or a court magistrate of superior court, district court, or
a department of a district court organized under chapter 3.46 RCW, or (e) who
is a personal assistant to a district court judge, superior court judge, or
court commissioner, or (f) excluded from a bargaining unit under RCW
41.56.201(2)(a). For the purpose of (e) of this subsection, no more than one
assistant for each judge or commissioner may be excluded from a bargaining
unit.

(3) "Bargaining
representative" means any lawful organization which has as one of its
primary purposes the representation of employees in their employment relations
with employers.

(4) "Collective
bargaining" means the performance of the mutual obligations of the public
employer and the exclusive bargaining representative to meet at reasonable
times, to confer and negotiate in good faith, and to execute a written
agreement with respect to grievance procedures and collective negotiations on
personnel matters, including wages, hours, housing allowances, and
working conditions, which may be peculiar to an appropriate bargaining unit of
such public employer, except that by such obligation neither party shall be
compelled to agree to a proposal or be required to make a concession unless
otherwise provided in this chapter.

(5)
"Commission" means the public employment relations commission.

(6) "Executive
director" means the executive director of the commission.

(7) "Uniformed
personnel" means: (a) Law enforcement officers as defined in RCW
41.26.030 employed by the governing body of any city or town with a population
of two thousand five hundred or more and law enforcement officers employed by
the governing body of any county with a population of ten thousand or more; (b)
correctional employees who are uniformed and nonuniformed, commissioned and
noncommissioned security personnel employed in a jail as defined in RCW
70.48.020(5), by a county with a population of seventy thousand or more, and
who are trained for and charged with the responsibility of controlling and
maintaining custody of inmates in the jail and safeguarding inmates from other
inmates; (c) general authority Washington peace officers as defined in RCW
10.93.020 employed by a port district in a county with a population of one
million or more; (d) security forces established under RCW 43.52.520; (e) fire
fighters as that term is defined in RCW 41.26.030; (f) employees of a port
district in a county with a population of one million or more whose duties
include crash fire rescue or other fire fighting duties; (g) employees of fire
departments of public employers who dispatch exclusively either fire or
emergency medical services, or both; or (h) employees in the several classes of
advanced life support technicians, as defined in RCW 18.71.200, who are
employed by a public employer.

(8) "Institution
of higher education" means the University of Washington, Washington State
University, Central Washington University, Eastern Washington University,
Western Washington University, The Evergreen State College, and the various
state community colleges.

Sec. 5. RCW 41.32.010 and 1997 c
254 s 3 are each amended to read as follows:

As used in this
chapter, unless a different meaning is plainly required by the context:

(1)(a)
"Accumulated contributions" for plan 1 members, means the sum of all
regular annuity contributions and, except for the purpose of withdrawal at the
time of retirement, any amount paid under RCW 41.50.165(2) with regular
interest thereon.

(b) "Accumulated
contributions" for plan 2 members, means the sum of all contributions
standing to the credit of a member in the member's individual account,
including any amount paid under RCW 41.50.165(2), together with the regular
interest thereon.

(2) "Actuarial
equivalent" means a benefit of equal value when computed upon the basis of
such mortality tables and regulations as shall be adopted by the director and
regular interest.

(3) "Annuity"
means the moneys payable per year during life by reason of accumulated
contributions of a member.

(4) "Member
reserve" means the fund in which all of the accumulated contributions of
members are held.

(5)(a)
"Beneficiary" for plan 1 members, means any person in receipt of a
retirement allowance or other benefit provided by this chapter.

(b)
"Beneficiary" for plan 2 and plan 3 members, means any person in
receipt of a retirement allowance or other benefit provided by this chapter
resulting from service rendered to an employer by another person.

(6)
"Contract" means any agreement for service and compensation between a
member and an employer.

(7) "Creditable
service" means membership service plus prior service for which credit is
allowable. This subsection shall apply only to plan 1 members.

(8)
"Dependent" means receiving one‑half or more of support from a
member.

(9) "Disability
allowance" means monthly payments during disability. This subsection
shall apply only to plan 1 members.

(10)(a) "Earnable
compensation" for plan 1 members, means:

(i) All salaries and
wages paid by an employer to an employee member of the retirement system for
personal services rendered during a fiscal year. In all cases where
compensation includes maintenance the employer shall fix the value of that part
of the compensation not paid in money.

(ii) "Earnable
compensation" for plan 1 members also includes the following actual or
imputed payments, which are not paid for personal services:

(A) Retroactive
payments to an individual by an employer on reinstatement of the employee in a
position, or payments by an employer to an individual in lieu of reinstatement
in a position which are awarded or granted as the equivalent of the salary or
wages which the individual would have earned during a payroll period shall be
considered earnable compensation and the individual shall receive the
equivalent service credit.

(B) If a leave of
absence, without pay, is taken by a member for the purpose of serving as a
member of the state legislature, and such member has served in the legislature
five or more years, the salary which would have been received for the position
from which the leave of absence was taken shall be considered as compensation
earnable if the employee's contribution thereon is paid by the employee. In
addition, where a member has been a member of the state legislature for five or
more years, earnable compensation for the member's two highest compensated
consecutive years of service shall include a sum not to exceed thirty‑six
hundred dollars for each of such two consecutive years, regardless of whether
or not legislative service was rendered during those two years.

(iii) For members employed
less than full time under written contract with a school district, or community
college district, in an instructional position, for which the member receives
service credit of less than one year in all of the years used to determine the
earnable compensation used for computing benefits due under RCW 41.32.497,
41.32.498, and 41.32.520, the member may elect to have earnable compensation
defined as provided in RCW 41.32.345. For the purposes of this subsection, the
term "instructional position" means a position in which more than
seventy‑five percent of the member's time is spent as a classroom
instructor (including office hours), a librarian, or a counselor. Earnable
compensation shall be so defined only for the purpose of the calculation of
retirement benefits and only as necessary to insure that members who receive
fractional service credit under RCW 41.32.270 receive benefits proportional to
those received by members who have received full‑time service credit.

(iv) "Earnable
compensation" does not include:

(A) Remuneration for
unused sick leave authorized under RCW 41.04.340, 28A.400.210, or 28A.310.490;

(B) Remuneration for
unused annual leave in excess of thirty days as authorized by RCW 43.01.044 and
43.01.041;

(C) Housing
allowances authorized in section 2 of this act.

(b) "Earnable
compensation" for plan 2 and plan 3 members, means salaries or wages
earned by a member during a payroll period for personal services, including
overtime payments, and shall include wages and salaries deferred under
provisions established pursuant to sections 403(b), 414(h), and 457 of the
United States Internal Revenue Code, but shall exclude lump sum payments for
deferred annual sick leave, unused accumulated vacation, unused accumulated
annual leave, or any form of severance pay.

"Earnable
compensation" for plan 2 and plan 3 members also includes the following
actual or imputed payments which, except in the case of (b)(ii)(B) of this
subsection, are not paid for personal services:

(i) Retroactive
payments to an individual by an employer on reinstatement of the employee in a
position or payments by an employer to an individual in lieu of reinstatement
in a position which are awarded or granted as the equivalent of the salary or
wages which the individual would have earned during a payroll period shall be
considered earnable compensation, to the extent provided above, and the
individual shall receive the equivalent service credit.

(ii) In any year in
which a member serves in the legislature the member shall have the option of
having such member's earnable compensation be the greater of:

(A) The earnable
compensation the member would have received had such member not served in the
legislature; or

(B) Such member's
actual earnable compensation received for teaching and legislative service
combined. Any additional contributions to the retirement system required
because compensation earnable under (b)(ii)(A) of this subsection is greater
than compensation earnable under (b)(ii)(B) of this subsection shall be paid by
the member for both member and employer contributions.

(11)
"Employer" means the state of Washington, the school district, or any
agency of the state of Washington by which the member is paid.

(12) "Fiscal
year" means a year which begins July 1st and ends June 30th of the
following year.

(13) "Former state
fund" means the state retirement fund in operation for teachers under
chapter 187, Laws of 1923, as amended.

(14) "Local
fund" means any of the local retirement funds for teachers operated in any
school district in accordance with the provisions of chapter 163, Laws of 1917
as amended.

(15) "Member"
means any teacher included in the membership of the retirement system. Also,
any other employee of the public schools who, on July 1, 1947, had not elected
to be exempt from membership and who, prior to that date, had by an authorized
payroll deduction, contributed to the member reserve.

(16) "Membership
service" means service rendered subsequent to the first day of eligibility
of a person to membership in the retirement system: PROVIDED, That where a
member is employed by two or more employers the individual shall receive no
more than one service credit month during any calendar month in which multiple
service is rendered. The provisions of this subsection shall apply only to
plan 1 members.

(17)
"Pension" means the moneys payable per year during life from the
pension reserve.

(18) "Pension
reserve" is a fund in which shall be accumulated an actuarial reserve
adequate to meet present and future pension liabilities of the system and from
which all pension obligations are to be paid.

(19) "Prior
service" means service rendered prior to the first date of eligibility to
membership in the retirement system for which credit is allowable. The
provisions of this subsection shall apply only to plan 1 members.

(20) "Prior
service contributions" means contributions made by a member to secure
credit for prior service. The provisions of this subsection shall apply only
to plan 1 members.

(21) "Public
school" means any institution or activity operated by the state of
Washington or any instrumentality or political subdivision thereof employing
teachers, except the University of Washington and Washington State University.

(22) "Regular contributions"
means the amounts required to be deducted from the compensation of a member and
credited to the member's individual account in the member reserve. This
subsection shall apply only to plan 1 members.

(23) "Regular
interest" means such rate as the director may determine.

(24)(a)
"Retirement allowance" for plan 1 members, means monthly payments
based on the sum of annuity and pension, or any optional benefits payable in
lieu thereof.

(b) "Retirement
allowance" for plan 2 and plan 3 members, means monthly payments to a
retiree or beneficiary as provided in this chapter.

(25) "Retirement
system" means the Washington state teachers' retirement system.

(26)(a)
"Service" for plan 1 members means the time during which a member has
been employed by an employer for compensation.

(i) If a member is
employed by two or more employers the individual shall receive no more than one
service credit month during any calendar month in which multiple service is
rendered.

(ii) As authorized by
RCW 28A.400.300, up to forty-five days of sick leave may be creditable as
service solely for the purpose of determining eligibility to retire under RCW
41.32.470.

(iii) As authorized in
RCW 41.32.065, service earned in an out-of-state retirement system that covers
teachers in public schools may be applied solely for the purpose of determining
eligibility to retire under RCW 41.32.470.

(b) "Service"
for plan 2 and plan 3 members, means periods of employment by a member for one
or more employers for which earnable compensation is earned subject to the
following conditions:

(i) A member employed
in an eligible position or as a substitute shall receive one service credit
month for each month of September through August of the following year if he or
she earns earnable compensation for eight hundred ten or more hours during that
period and is employed during nine of those months, except that a member may
not receive credit for any period prior to the member's employment in an
eligible position except as provided in RCW 41.32.812 and 41.50.132;

(ii) If a member is
employed either in an eligible position or as a substitute teacher for nine
months of the twelve month period between September through August of the
following year but earns earnable compensation for less than eight hundred ten
hours but for at least six hundred thirty hours, he or she will receive one‑half
of a service credit month for each month of the twelve month period;

(iii) All other members
in an eligible position or as a substitute teacher shall receive service credit
as follows:

(A) A service credit
month is earned in those calendar months where earnable compensation is earned
for ninety or more hours;

(B) A half-service
credit month is earned in those calendar months where earnable compensation is
earned for at least seventy hours but less than ninety hours; and

(C) A quarter-service
credit month is earned in those calendar months where earnable compensation is
earned for less than seventy hours.

(iv) Any person who is
a member of the teachers' retirement system and who is elected or appointed to
a state elective position may continue to be a member of the retirement system
and continue to receive a service credit month for each of the months in a
state elective position by making the required member contributions.

(v) When an individual
is employed by two or more employers the individual shall only receive one
month's service credit during any calendar month in which multiple service for
ninety or more hours is rendered.

(vi) As authorized by
RCW 28A.400.300, up to forty-five days of sick leave may be creditable as
service solely for the purpose of determining eligibility to retire under RCW
41.32.470. For purposes of plan 2 and plan 3 "forty-five days" as
used in RCW 28A.400.300 is equal to two service credit months. Use of less
than forty-five days of sick leave is creditable as allowed under this
subsection as follows:

(A) Less than eleven
days equals one-quarter service credit month;

(B) Eleven or more days
but less than twenty-two days equals one-half service credit month;

(C) Twenty-two days
equals one service credit month;

(D) More than
twenty-two days but less than thirty-three days equals one and one-quarter
service credit month;

(E) Thirty-three or
more days but less than forty-five days equals one and one-half service credit
month.

(vii) As authorized in
RCW 41.32.065, service earned in an out-of-state retirement system that covers
teachers in public schools may be applied solely for the purpose of determining
eligibility to retire under RCW 41.32.470.

(viii) The department
shall adopt rules implementing this subsection.

(27) "Service
credit year" means an accumulation of months of service credit which is
equal to one when divided by twelve.

(28) "Service
credit month" means a full service credit month or an accumulation of
partial service credit months that are equal to one.

(29)
"Teacher" means any person qualified to teach who is engaged by a
public school in an instructional, administrative, or supervisory capacity.
The term includes state, educational service district, and school district
superintendents and their assistants and all employees certificated by the
superintendent of public instruction; and in addition thereto any full time
school doctor who is employed by a public school and renders service of an
instructional or educational nature.

(30) "Average
final compensation" for plan 2 and plan 3 members, means the member's
average earnable compensation of the highest consecutive sixty service credit
months prior to such member's retirement, termination, or death. Periods
constituting authorized leaves of absence may not be used in the calculation of
average final compensation except under RCW 41.32.810(2).

(31)
"Retiree" means any person who has begun accruing a retirement
allowance or other benefit provided by this chapter resulting from service
rendered to an employer while a member.

(32)
"Department" means the department of retirement systems created in
chapter 41.50 RCW.

(33)
"Director" means the director of the department.

(34) "State
elective position" means any position held by any person elected or
appointed to statewide office or elected or appointed as a member of the
legislature.

(35) "State
actuary" or "actuary" means the person appointed pursuant to RCW
44.44.010(2).

(36) "Substitute
teacher" means:

(a) A teacher who is
hired by an employer to work as a temporary teacher, except for teachers who
are annual contract employees of an employer and are guaranteed a minimum
number of hours; or

(b) Teachers who either
(i) work in ineligible positions for more than one employer or (ii) work in an
ineligible position or positions together with an eligible position.

(37)(a) "Eligible
position" for plan 2 members from June 7, 1990, through September 1, 1991,
means a position which normally requires two or more uninterrupted months of
creditable service during September through August of the following year.

(b) "Eligible
position" for plan 2 and plan 3 on and after September 1, 1991, means a
position that, as defined by the employer, normally requires five or more
months of at least seventy hours of earnable compensation during September
through August of the following year.

(c) For purposes of
this chapter an employer shall not define "position" in such a manner
that an employee's monthly work for that employer is divided into more than one
position.

(d) The elected
position of the superintendent of public instruction is an eligible position.

(38) "Plan 1"
means the teachers' retirement system, plan 1 providing the benefits and
funding provisions covering persons who first became members of the system
prior to October 1, 1977.

(39) "Plan 2"
means the teachers' retirement system, plan 2 providing the benefits and
funding provisions covering persons who first became members of the system on
and after October 1, 1977, and prior to July 1, 1996.

(40) "Plan 3"
means the teachers' retirement system, plan 3 providing the benefits and
funding provisions covering persons who first become members of the system on
and after July 1, 1996, or who transfer under RCW 41.32.817.

(41) "Index"
means, for any calendar year, that year's annual average consumer price index,
Seattle, Washington area, for urban wage earners and clerical workers, all
items compiled by the bureau of labor statistics, United States department of
labor.

(42) "Index
A" means the index for the year prior to the determination of a
postretirement adjustment.

(43) "Index
B" means the index for the year prior to index A.

(44) "Index
year" means the earliest calendar year in which the index is more than
sixty percent of index A.

(45) "Adjustment
ratio" means the value of index A divided by index B.

(46) "Annual
increase" means, initially, fifty-nine cents per month per year of service
which amount shall be increased each July 1st by three percent, rounded to the
nearest cent.

(47) "Member
account" or "member's account" for purposes of plan 3 means the
sum of the contributions and earnings on behalf of the member in the defined
contribution portion of plan 3.

(48) "Separation
from service or employment" occurs when a person has terminated all
employment with an employer.

(49)
"Employed" or "employee" means a person who is providing
services for compensation to an employer, unless the person is free from the
employer's direction and control over the performance of work. The department
shall adopt rules and interpret this subsection consistent with common law.

Sec. 6. RCW 41.40.010 and 1998 c
341 s 601 are each amended to read as follows:

As used in this
chapter, unless a different meaning is plainly required by the context:

(1) "Retirement
system" means the public employees' retirement system provided for in this
chapter.

(2)
"Department" means the department of retirement systems created in
chapter 41.50 RCW.

(3) "State
treasurer" means the treasurer of the state of Washington.

(4)(a)
"Employer" for plan 1 members, means every branch, department,
agency, commission, board, and office of the state, any political subdivision
or association of political subdivisions of the state admitted into the
retirement system, and legal entities authorized by RCW 35.63.070 and 36.70.060
or chapter 39.34 RCW; and the term shall also include any labor guild,
association, or organization the membership of a local lodge or division of
which is comprised of at least forty percent employees of an employer (other
than such labor guild, association, or organization) within this chapter. The
term may also include any city of the first class that has its own retirement
system.

(b)
"Employer" for plan 2 members, means every branch, department,
agency, commission, board, and office of the state, and any political
subdivision and municipal corporation of the state admitted into the retirement
system, including public agencies created pursuant to RCW 35.63.070, 36.70.060,
and 39.34.030; except that after August 31, 2000, school districts and
educational service districts will no longer be employers for the public
employees' retirement system plan 2.

(5) "Member"
means any employee included in the membership of the retirement system, as
provided for in RCW 41.40.023. RCW 41.26.045 does not prohibit a person
otherwise eligible for membership in the retirement system from establishing
such membership effective when he or she first entered an eligible position.

(6) "Original
member" of this retirement system means:

(a) Any person who
became a member of the system prior to April 1, 1949;

(b) Any person who
becomes a member through the admission of an employer into the retirement
system on and after April 1, 1949, and prior to April 1, 1951;

(c) Any person who
first becomes a member by securing employment with an employer prior to April
1, 1951, provided the member has rendered at least one or more years of service
to any employer prior to October 1, 1947;

(d) Any person who
first becomes a member through the admission of an employer into the retirement
system on or after April 1, 1951, provided, such person has been in the regular
employ of the employer for at least six months of the twelve-month period
preceding the said admission date;

(e) Any member who has
restored all contributions that may have been withdrawn as provided by RCW
41.40.150 and who on the effective date of the individual's retirement becomes
entitled to be credited with ten years or more of membership service except
that the provisions relating to the minimum amount of retirement allowance for
the member upon retirement at age seventy as found in RCW 41.40.190(4) shall
not apply to the member;

(f) Any member who has
been a contributor under the system for two or more years and who has restored
all contributions that may have been withdrawn as provided by RCW 41.40.150 and
who on the effective date of the individual's retirement has rendered five or
more years of service for the state or any political subdivision prior to the
time of the admission of the employer into the system; except that the
provisions relating to the minimum amount of retirement allowance for the
member upon retirement at age seventy as found in RCW 41.40.190(4) shall not
apply to the member.

(7) "New
member" means a person who becomes a member on or after April 1, 1949,
except as otherwise provided in this section.

(8)(a)
"Compensation earnable" for plan 1 members, means salaries or wages
earned during a payroll period for personal services and where the compensation
is not all paid in money, maintenance compensation shall be included upon the
basis of the schedules established by the member's employer.

(i) "Compensation
earnable" for plan 1 members also includes the following actual or imputed
payments, which are not paid for personal services:

(A) Retroactive
payments to an individual by an employer on reinstatement of the employee in a
position, or payments by an employer to an individual in lieu of reinstatement
in a position which are awarded or granted as the equivalent of the salary or
wage which the individual would have earned during a payroll period shall be
considered compensation earnable and the individual shall receive the
equivalent service credit;

(B) If a leave of
absence is taken by an individual for the purpose of serving in the state
legislature, the salary which would have been received for the position from
which the leave of absence was taken, shall be considered as compensation
earnable if the employee's contribution is paid by the employee and the
employer's contribution is paid by the employer or employee;

(C) Assault pay only as
authorized by RCW 27.04.100, 72.01.045, and 72.09.240;

(D) Compensation that a
member would have received but for a disability occurring in the line of duty
only as authorized by RCW 41.40.038;

(E) Compensation that a
member receives due to participation in the leave sharing program only as
authorized by RCW 41.04.650 through 41.04.670; and

(F) Compensation that a
member receives for being in standby status. For the purposes of this section,
a member is in standby status when not being paid for time actually worked and
the employer requires the member to be prepared to report immediately for work,
if the need arises, although the need may not arise.

(ii) "Compensation
earnable" does not include:

(A) Remuneration for
unused sick leave authorized under RCW 41.04.340, 28A.400.210, or 28A.310.490;

(B) Remuneration for
unused annual leave in excess of thirty days as authorized by RCW 43.01.044 and
43.01.041;

(C) Housing
allowances authorized in section 2 of this act.

(b) "Compensation
earnable" for plan 2 members, means salaries or wages earned by a member
during a payroll period for personal services, including overtime payments, and
shall include wages and salaries deferred under provisions established pursuant
to sections 403(b), 414(h), and 457 of the United States Internal Revenue Code,
but shall exclude nonmoney maintenance compensation and lump sum or other
payments for deferred annual sick leave, unused accumulated vacation, unused
accumulated annual leave, or any form of severance pay.

"Compensation
earnable" for plan 2 members also includes the following actual or imputed
payments, which are not paid for personal services:

(i) Retroactive
payments to an individual by an employer on reinstatement of the employee in a
position, or payments by an employer to an individual in lieu of reinstatement
in a position which are awarded or granted as the equivalent of the salary or
wage which the individual would have earned during a payroll period shall be
considered compensation earnable to the extent provided above, and the
individual shall receive the equivalent service credit;

(ii) In any year in
which a member serves in the legislature, the member shall have the option of
having such member's compensation earnable be the greater of:

(A) The compensation
earnable the member would have received had such member not served in the
legislature; or

(B) Such member's
actual compensation earnable received for nonlegislative public employment and
legislative service combined. Any additional contributions to the retirement
system required because compensation earnable under (b)(ii)(A) of this
subsection is greater than compensation earnable under (b)(ii)(B) of this
subsection shall be paid by the member for both member and employer
contributions;

(iii) Assault pay only
as authorized by RCW 27.04.100, 72.01.045, and 72.09.240;

(iv) Compensation that
a member would have received but for a disability occurring in the line of duty
only as authorized by RCW 41.40.038;

(v) Compensation that a
member receives due to participation in the leave sharing program only as
authorized by RCW 41.04.650 through 41.04.670; and

(vi) Compensation that
a member receives for being in standby status. For the purposes of this
section, a member is in standby status when not being paid for time actually
worked and the employer requires the member to be prepared to report
immediately for work, if the need arises, although the need may not arise.

(9)(a)
"Service" for plan 1 members, except as provided in RCW 41.40.088,
means periods of employment in an eligible position or positions for one or
more employers rendered to any employer for which compensation is paid, and
includes time spent in office as an elected or appointed official of an
employer. Compensation earnable earned in full time work for seventy hours or
more in any given calendar month shall constitute one service credit month
except as provided in RCW 41.40.088. Compensation earnable earned for less
than seventy hours in any calendar month shall constitute one-quarter service
credit month of service except as provided in RCW 41.40.088. Only service
credit months and one-quarter service credit months shall be counted in the
computation of any retirement allowance or other benefit provided for in this
chapter. Any fraction of a year of service shall be taken into account in the
computation of such retirement allowance or benefits. Time spent in standby
status, whether compensated or not, is not service.

(i) Service by a state
employee officially assigned by the state on a temporary basis to assist
another public agency, shall be considered as service as a state employee:
PROVIDED, That service to any other public agency shall not be considered
service as a state employee if such service has been used to establish benefits
in any other public retirement system.

(ii) An individual
shall receive no more than a total of twelve service credit months of service
during any calendar year. If an individual is employed in an eligible position
by one or more employers the individual shall receive no more than one service
credit month during any calendar month in which multiple service for seventy or
more hours is rendered.

(iii) A school district
employee may count up to forty-five days of sick leave as creditable service
solely for the purpose of determining eligibility to retire under RCW 41.40.180
as authorized by RCW 28A.400.300. For purposes of plan 1 "forty-five
days" as used in RCW 28A.400.300 is equal to two service credit months.
Use of less than forty-five days of sick leave is creditable as allowed under
this subsection as follows:

(A) Less than
twenty-two days equals one-quarter service credit month;

(B) Twenty-two days
equals one service credit month;

(C) More than
twenty-two days but less than forty-five days equals one and one-quarter
service credit month.

(b) "Service"
for plan 2 members, means periods of employment by a member in an eligible
position or positions for one or more employers for which compensation earnable
is paid. Compensation earnable earned for ninety or more hours in any calendar
month shall constitute one service credit month except as provided in RCW
41.40.088. Compensation earnable earned for at least seventy hours but less
than ninety hours in any calendar month shall constitute one-half service
credit month of service. Compensation earnable earned for less than seventy
hours in any calendar month shall constitute one-quarter service credit month
of service. Time spent in standby status, whether compensated or not, is not
service.

Any fraction of a year
of service shall be taken into account in the computation of such retirement
allowance or benefits.

(i) Service in any
state elective position shall be deemed to be full time service, except that
persons serving in state elective positions who are members of the Washington
school employees' retirement system, teachers' retirement system, or law
enforcement officers' and fire fighters' retirement system at the time of
election or appointment to such position may elect to continue membership in
the Washington school employees' retirement system, teachers' retirement
system, or law enforcement officers' and fire fighters' retirement system.

(ii) A member shall
receive a total of not more than twelve service credit months of service for
such calendar year. If an individual is employed in an eligible position by
one or more employers the individual shall receive no more than one service
credit month during any calendar month in which multiple service for ninety or
more hours is rendered.

(iii) Up to forty-five
days of sick leave may be creditable as service solely for the purpose of
determining eligibility to retire under RCW 41.40.180 as authorized by RCW
28A.400.300. For purposes of plan 2 "forty-five days" as used in RCW
28A.400.300 is equal to two service credit months. Use of less than forty-five
days of sick leave is creditable as allowed under this subsection as follows:

(A) Less than eleven
days equals one-quarter service credit month;

(B) Eleven or more days
but less than twenty-two days equals one-half service credit month;

(C) Twenty-two days
equals one service credit month;

(D) More than
twenty-two days but less than thirty-three days equals one and one-quarter
service credit month;

(E) Thirty-three or
more days but less than forty-five days equals one and one-half service credit
month.

(10) "Service
credit year" means an accumulation of months of service credit which is
equal to one when divided by twelve.

(11) "Service
credit month" means a month or an accumulation of months of service credit
which is equal to one.

(12) "Prior
service" means all service of an original member rendered to any employer
prior to October 1, 1947.

(13) "Membership
service" means:

(a) All service rendered,
as a member, after October 1, 1947;

(b) All service after
October 1, 1947, to any employer prior to the time of its admission into the
retirement system for which member and employer contributions, plus interest as
required by RCW 41.50.125, have been paid under RCW 41.40.056 or 41.40.057;

(c) Service not to
exceed six consecutive months of probationary service rendered after April 1,
1949, and prior to becoming a member, in the case of any member, upon payment
in full by such member of the total amount of the employer's contribution to
the retirement fund which would have been required under the law in effect when
such probationary service was rendered if the member had been a member during
such period, except that the amount of the employer's contribution shall be
calculated by the director based on the first month's compensation earnable as
a member;

(d) Service not to
exceed six consecutive months of probationary service, rendered after October
1, 1947, and before April 1, 1949, and prior to becoming a member, in the case
of any member, upon payment in full by such member of five percent of such
member's salary during said period of probationary service, except that the
amount of the employer's contribution shall be calculated by the director based
on the first month's compensation earnable as a member.

(14)(a)
"Beneficiary" for plan 1 members, means any person in receipt of a
retirement allowance, pension or other benefit provided by this chapter.

(b)
"Beneficiary" for plan 2 members, means any person in receipt of a
retirement allowance or other benefit provided by this chapter resulting from
service rendered to an employer by another person.

(15) "Regular
interest" means such rate as the director may determine.

(16) "Accumulated
contributions" means the sum of all contributions standing to the credit
of a member in the member's individual account, including any amount paid under
RCW 41.50.165(2), together with the regular interest thereon.

(17)(a) "Average
final compensation" for plan 1 members, means the annual average of the
greatest compensation earnable by a member during any consecutive two year
period of service credit months for which service credit is allowed; or if the
member has less than two years of service credit months then the annual average
compensation earnable during the total years of service for which service
credit is allowed.

(b) "Average final
compensation" for plan 2 members, means the member's average compensation
earnable of the highest consecutive sixty months of service credit months prior
to such member's retirement, termination, or death. Periods constituting
authorized leaves of absence may not be used in the calculation of average
final compensation except under RCW 41.40.710(2).

(18) "Final
compensation" means the annual rate of compensation earnable by a member
at the time of termination of employment.

(19)
"Annuity" means payments for life derived from accumulated
contributions of a member. All annuities shall be paid in monthly
installments.

(20) "Pension"
means payments for life derived from contributions made by the employer. All
pensions shall be paid in monthly installments.

(21) "Retirement
allowance" means the sum of the annuity and the pension.

(22)
"Employee" or "employed" means a person who is providing
services for compensation to an employer, unless the person is free from the
employer's direction and control over the performance of work. The department
shall adopt rules and interpret this subsection consistent with common law.

(23) "Actuarial
equivalent" means a benefit of equal value when computed upon the basis of
such mortality and other tables as may be adopted by the director.

(24)
"Retirement" means withdrawal from active service with a retirement
allowance as provided by this chapter.

(25) "Eligible
position" means:

(a) Any position that,
as defined by the employer, normally requires five or more months of service a
year for which regular compensation for at least seventy hours is earned by the
occupant thereof. For purposes of this chapter an employer shall not define
"position" in such a manner that an employee's monthly work for that
employer is divided into more than one position;

(b) Any position
occupied by an elected official or person appointed directly by the governor,
or appointed by the chief justice of the supreme court under RCW 2.04.240(2) or
2.06.150(2), for which compensation is paid.

(26) "Ineligible
position" means any position which does not conform with the requirements
set forth in subsection (25) of this section.

(27) "Leave of
absence" means the period of time a member is authorized by the employer
to be absent from service without being separated from membership.

(28) "Totally
incapacitated for duty" means total inability to perform the duties of a
member's employment or office or any other work for which the member is
qualified by training or experience.

(29) "Retiree"
means any person who has begun accruing a retirement allowance or other benefit
provided by this chapter resulting from service rendered to an employer while a
member.

(30)
"Director" means the director of the department.

(31) "State
elective position" means any position held by any person elected or
appointed to statewide office or elected or appointed as a member of the
legislature.

(32) "State
actuary" or "actuary" means the person appointed pursuant to RCW
44.44.010(2).

(33) "Plan 1"
means the public employees' retirement system, plan 1 providing the benefits
and funding provisions covering persons who first became members of the system
prior to October 1, 1977.

(34) "Plan 2"
means the public employees' retirement system, plan 2 providing the benefits
and funding provisions covering persons who first became members of the system
on and after October 1, 1977.

(35) "Index"
means, for any calendar year, that year's annual average consumer price index,
Seattle, Washington area, for urban wage earners and clerical workers, all
items, compiled by the bureau of labor statistics, United States department of
labor.

(36) "Index
A" means the index for the year prior to the determination of a
postretirement adjustment.

(37) "Index
B" means the index for the year prior to index A.

(38) "Index
year" means the earliest calendar year in which the index is more than
sixty percent of index A.

(39) "Adjustment
ratio" means the value of index A divided by index B.

(40) "Annual
increase" means, initially, fifty-nine cents per month per year of service
which amount shall be increased each July 1st by three percent, rounded to the
nearest cent.

(41) "Separation
from service" occurs when a person has terminated all employment with an
employer.

Sec. 7. RCW 41.40.010 and 2000 c
247 s 102 are each amended to read as follows:

As used in this
chapter, unless a different meaning is plainly required by the context:

(1) "Retirement
system" means the public employees' retirement system provided for in this
chapter.

(2)
"Department" means the department of retirement systems created in
chapter 41.50 RCW.

(3) "State
treasurer" means the treasurer of the state of Washington.

(4)(a)
"Employer" for plan 1 members, means every branch, department,
agency, commission, board, and office of the state, any political subdivision
or association of political subdivisions of the state admitted into the
retirement system, and legal entities authorized by RCW 35.63.070 and 36.70.060
or chapter 39.34 RCW; and the term shall also include any labor guild,
association, or organization the membership of a local lodge or division of
which is comprised of at least forty percent employees of an employer (other
than such labor guild, association, or organization) within this chapter. The
term may also include any city of the first class that has its own retirement
system.

(b)
"Employer" for plan 2 and plan 3 members, means every branch,
department, agency, commission, board, and office of the state, and any
political subdivision and municipal corporation of the state admitted into the
retirement system, including public agencies created pursuant to RCW 35.63.070,
36.70.060, and 39.34.030; except that after August 31, 2000, school districts
and educational service districts will no longer be employers for the public
employees' retirement system plan 2.

(5) "Member"
means any employee included in the membership of the retirement system, as
provided for in RCW 41.40.023. RCW 41.26.045 does not prohibit a person
otherwise eligible for membership in the retirement system from establishing
such membership effective when he or she first entered an eligible position.

(6) "Original
member" of this retirement system means:

(a) Any person who
became a member of the system prior to April 1, 1949;

(b) Any person who
becomes a member through the admission of an employer into the retirement
system on and after April 1, 1949, and prior to April 1, 1951;

(c) Any person who
first becomes a member by securing employment with an employer prior to April
1, 1951, provided the member has rendered at least one or more years of service
to any employer prior to October 1, 1947;

(d) Any person who
first becomes a member through the admission of an employer into the retirement
system on or after April 1, 1951, provided, such person has been in the regular
employ of the employer for at least six months of the twelve-month period
preceding the said admission date;

(e) Any member who has
restored all contributions that may have been withdrawn as provided by RCW
41.40.150 and who on the effective date of the individual's retirement becomes
entitled to be credited with ten years or more of membership service except
that the provisions relating to the minimum amount of retirement allowance for
the member upon retirement at age seventy as found in RCW 41.40.190(4) shall
not apply to the member;

(f) Any member who has
been a contributor under the system for two or more years and who has restored
all contributions that may have been withdrawn as provided by RCW 41.40.150 and
who on the effective date of the individual's retirement has rendered five or
more years of service for the state or any political subdivision prior to the
time of the admission of the employer into the system; except that the
provisions relating to the minimum amount of retirement allowance for the
member upon retirement at age seventy as found in RCW 41.40.190(4) shall not
apply to the member.

(7) "New
member" means a person who becomes a member on or after April 1, 1949,
except as otherwise provided in this section.

(8)(a)
"Compensation earnable" for plan 1 members, means salaries or wages
earned during a payroll period for personal services and where the compensation
is not all paid in money, maintenance compensation shall be included upon the
basis of the schedules established by the member's employer.

(i) "Compensation
earnable" for plan 1 members also includes the following actual or imputed
payments, which are not paid for personal services:

(A) Retroactive
payments to an individual by an employer on reinstatement of the employee in a
position, or payments by an employer to an individual in lieu of reinstatement
in a position which are awarded or granted as the equivalent of the salary or
wage which the individual would have earned during a payroll period shall be
considered compensation earnable and the individual shall receive the
equivalent service credit;

(B) If a leave of
absence is taken by an individual for the purpose of serving in the state
legislature, the salary which would have been received for the position from
which the leave of absence was taken, shall be considered as compensation
earnable if the employee's contribution is paid by the employee and the
employer's contribution is paid by the employer or employee;

(C) Assault pay only as
authorized by RCW 27.04.100, 72.01.045, and 72.09.240;

(D) Compensation that a
member would have received but for a disability occurring in the line of duty only
as authorized by RCW 41.40.038;

(E) Compensation that a
member receives due to participation in the leave sharing program only as
authorized by RCW 41.04.650 through 41.04.670; and

(F) Compensation that a
member receives for being in standby status. For the purposes of this section,
a member is in standby status when not being paid for time actually worked and
the employer requires the member to be prepared to report immediately for work,
if the need arises, although the need may not arise.

(ii) "Compensation
earnable" does not include:

(A) Remuneration for
unused sick leave authorized under RCW 41.04.340, 28A.400.210, or 28A.310.490;

(B) Remuneration for
unused annual leave in excess of thirty days as authorized by RCW 43.01.044 and
43.01.041;

(C) Housing
allowances authorized in section 2 of this act.

(b) "Compensation
earnable" for plan 2 and plan 3 members, means salaries or wages earned by
a member during a payroll period for personal services, including overtime
payments, and shall include wages and salaries deferred under provisions
established pursuant to sections 403(b), 414(h), and 457 of the United States
Internal Revenue Code, but shall exclude nonmoney maintenance compensation and
lump sum or other payments for deferred annual sick leave, unused accumulated
vacation, unused accumulated annual leave, or any form of severance pay.

"Compensation
earnable" for plan 2 and plan 3 members also includes the following actual
or imputed payments, which are not paid for personal services:

(i) Retroactive
payments to an individual by an employer on reinstatement of the employee in a
position, or payments by an employer to an individual in lieu of reinstatement
in a position which are awarded or granted as the equivalent of the salary or
wage which the individual would have earned during a payroll period shall be
considered compensation earnable to the extent provided above, and the
individual shall receive the equivalent service credit;

(ii) In any year in
which a member serves in the legislature, the member shall have the option of
having such member's compensation earnable be the greater of:

(A) The compensation
earnable the member would have received had such member not served in the
legislature; or

(B) Such member's
actual compensation earnable received for nonlegislative public employment and
legislative service combined. Any additional contributions to the retirement
system required because compensation earnable under (b)(ii)(A) of this
subsection is greater than compensation earnable under (b)(ii)(B) of this
subsection shall be paid by the member for both member and employer
contributions;

(iii) Assault pay only
as authorized by RCW 27.04.100, 72.01.045, and 72.09.240;

(iv) Compensation that
a member would have received but for a disability occurring in the line of duty
only as authorized by RCW 41.40.038;

(v) Compensation that a
member receives due to participation in the leave sharing program only as
authorized by RCW 41.04.650 through 41.04.670; and

(vi) Compensation that
a member receives for being in standby status. For the purposes of this
section, a member is in standby status when not being paid for time actually
worked and the employer requires the member to be prepared to report
immediately for work, if the need arises, although the need may not arise.

(9)(a)
"Service" for plan 1 members, except as provided in RCW 41.40.088,
means periods of employment in an eligible position or positions for one or
more employers rendered to any employer for which compensation is paid, and
includes time spent in office as an elected or appointed official of an
employer. Compensation earnable earned in full time work for seventy hours or
more in any given calendar month shall constitute one service credit month
except as provided in RCW 41.40.088. Compensation earnable earned for less
than seventy hours in any calendar month shall constitute one-quarter service
credit month of service except as provided in RCW 41.40.088. Only service
credit months and one-quarter service credit months shall be counted in the
computation of any retirement allowance or other benefit provided for in this
chapter. Any fraction of a year of service shall be taken into account in the
computation of such retirement allowance or benefits. Time spent in standby status,
whether compensated or not, is not service.

(i) Service by a state
employee officially assigned by the state on a temporary basis to assist
another public agency, shall be considered as service as a state employee:
PROVIDED, That service to any other public agency shall not be considered
service as a state employee if such service has been used to establish benefits
in any other public retirement system.

(ii) An individual
shall receive no more than a total of twelve service credit months of service
during any calendar year. If an individual is employed in an eligible position
by one or more employers the individual shall receive no more than one service
credit month during any calendar month in which multiple service for seventy or
more hours is rendered.

(iii) A school district
employee may count up to forty-five days of sick leave as creditable service
solely for the purpose of determining eligibility to retire under RCW 41.40.180
as authorized by RCW 28A.400.300. For purposes of plan 1 "forty-five
days" as used in RCW 28A.400.300 is equal to two service credit months.
Use of less than forty-five days of sick leave is creditable as allowed under
this subsection as follows:

(A) Less than
twenty-two days equals one-quarter service credit month;

(B) Twenty-two days
equals one service credit month;

(C) More than
twenty-two days but less than forty-five days equals one and one-quarter
service credit month.

(b) "Service"
for plan 2 and plan 3 members, means periods of employment by a member in an
eligible position or positions for one or more employers for which compensation
earnable is paid. Compensation earnable earned for ninety or more hours in any
calendar month shall constitute one service credit month except as provided in
RCW 41.40.088. Compensation earnable earned for at least seventy hours but
less than ninety hours in any calendar month shall constitute one-half service
credit month of service. Compensation earnable earned for less than seventy
hours in any calendar month shall constitute one-quarter service credit month
of service. Time spent in standby status, whether compensated or not, is not
service.

Any fraction of a year
of service shall be taken into account in the computation of such retirement
allowance or benefits.

(i) Service in any
state elective position shall be deemed to be full time service, except that
persons serving in state elective positions who are members of the Washington
school employees' retirement system, teachers' retirement system, or law
enforcement officers' and fire fighters' retirement system at the time of
election or appointment to such position may elect to continue membership in
the Washington school employees' retirement system, teachers' retirement
system, or law enforcement officers' and fire fighters' retirement system.

(ii) A member shall
receive a total of not more than twelve service credit months of service for
such calendar year. If an individual is employed in an eligible position by
one or more employers the individual shall receive no more than one service
credit month during any calendar month in which multiple service for ninety or
more hours is rendered.

(iii) Up to forty-five
days of sick leave may be creditable as service solely for the purpose of
determining eligibility to retire under RCW 41.40.180 as authorized by RCW
28A.400.300. For purposes of plan 2 and plan 3 "forty-five days" as
used in RCW 28A.400.300 is equal to two service credit months. Use of less
than forty-five days of sick leave is creditable as allowed under this
subsection as follows:

(A) Less than eleven
days equals one-quarter service credit month;

(B) Eleven or more days
but less than twenty-two days equals one-half service credit month;

(C) Twenty-two days
equals one service credit month;

(D) More than
twenty-two days but less than thirty-three days equals one and one-quarter
service credit month;

(E) Thirty-three or
more days but less than forty-five days equals one and one-half service credit
month.

(10) "Service
credit year" means an accumulation of months of service credit which is
equal to one when divided by twelve.

(11) "Service
credit month" means a month or an accumulation of months of service credit
which is equal to one.

(12) "Prior
service" means all service of an original member rendered to any employer
prior to October 1, 1947.

(13) "Membership
service" means:

(a) All service
rendered, as a member, after October 1, 1947;

(b) All service after
October 1, 1947, to any employer prior to the time of its admission into the
retirement system for which member and employer contributions, plus interest as
required by RCW 41.50.125, have been paid under RCW 41.40.056 or 41.40.057;

(c) Service not to
exceed six consecutive months of probationary service rendered after April 1,
1949, and prior to becoming a member, in the case of any member, upon payment
in full by such member of the total amount of the employer's contribution to
the retirement fund which would have been required under the law in effect when
such probationary service was rendered if the member had been a member during
such period, except that the amount of the employer's contribution shall be
calculated by the director based on the first month's compensation earnable as
a member;

(d) Service not to
exceed six consecutive months of probationary service, rendered after October
1, 1947, and before April 1, 1949, and prior to becoming a member, in the case
of any member, upon payment in full by such member of five percent of such member's
salary during said period of probationary service, except that the amount of
the employer's contribution shall be calculated by the director based on the
first month's compensation earnable as a member.

(14)(a)
"Beneficiary" for plan 1 members, means any person in receipt of a
retirement allowance, pension or other benefit provided by this chapter.

(b)
"Beneficiary" for plan 2 and plan 3 members, means any person in
receipt of a retirement allowance or other benefit provided by this chapter
resulting from service rendered to an employer by another person.

(15) "Regular
interest" means such rate as the director may determine.

(16) "Accumulated
contributions" means the sum of all contributions standing to the credit
of a member in the member's individual account, including any amount paid under
RCW 41.50.165(2), together with the regular interest thereon.

(17)(a) "Average
final compensation" for plan 1 members, means the annual average of the
greatest compensation earnable by a member during any consecutive two year
period of service credit months for which service credit is allowed; or if the
member has less than two years of service credit months then the annual average
compensation earnable during the total years of service for which service
credit is allowed.

(b) "Average final
compensation" for plan 2 and plan 3 members, means the member's average
compensation earnable of the highest consecutive sixty months of service credit
months prior to such member's retirement, termination, or death. Periods constituting
authorized leaves of absence may not be used in the calculation of average
final compensation except under RCW 41.40.710(2).

(18) "Final
compensation" means the annual rate of compensation earnable by a member
at the time of termination of employment.

(19)
"Annuity" means payments for life derived from accumulated
contributions of a member. All annuities shall be paid in monthly
installments.

(20)
"Pension" means payments for life derived from contributions made by
the employer. All pensions shall be paid in monthly installments.

(21) "Retirement
allowance" means the sum of the annuity and the pension.

(22)
"Employee" or "employed" means a person who is providing
services for compensation to an employer, unless the person is free from the
employer's direction and control over the performance of work. The department
shall adopt rules and interpret this subsection consistent with common law.

(23) "Actuarial
equivalent" means a benefit of equal value when computed upon the basis of
such mortality and other tables as may be adopted by the director.

(24)
"Retirement" means withdrawal from active service with a retirement
allowance as provided by this chapter.

(25) "Eligible
position" means:

(a) Any position that,
as defined by the employer, normally requires five or more months of service a
year for which regular compensation for at least seventy hours is earned by the
occupant thereof. For purposes of this chapter an employer shall not define
"position" in such a manner that an employee's monthly work for that
employer is divided into more than one position;

(b) Any position
occupied by an elected official or person appointed directly by the governor,
or appointed by the chief justice of the supreme court under RCW 2.04.240(2) or
2.06.150(2), for which compensation is paid.

(26) "Ineligible
position" means any position which does not conform with the requirements
set forth in subsection (25) of this section.

(27) "Leave of
absence" means the period of time a member is authorized by the employer
to be absent from service without being separated from membership.

(28) "Totally
incapacitated for duty" means total inability to perform the duties of a
member's employment or office or any other work for which the member is
qualified by training or experience.

(29)
"Retiree" means any person who has begun accruing a retirement
allowance or other benefit provided by this chapter resulting from service
rendered to an employer while a member.

(30)
"Director" means the director of the department.

(31) "State
elective position" means any position held by any person elected or
appointed to statewide office or elected or appointed as a member of the
legislature.

(32) "State
actuary" or "actuary" means the person appointed pursuant to RCW
44.44.010(2).

(33) "Plan 1"
means the public employees' retirement system, plan 1 providing the benefits
and funding provisions covering persons who first became members of the system
prior to October 1, 1977.

(34) "Plan 2"
means the public employees' retirement system, plan 2 providing the benefits
and funding provisions covering persons who first became members of the system
on and after October 1, 1977, and are not included in plan 3.

(35) "Plan 3"
means the public employees' retirement system, plan 3 providing the benefits
and funding provisions covering persons who:

(a) First become a
member on or after:

(i) March 1, 2002, and
are employed by a state agency or institute of higher education and who did not
choose to enter plan 2; or

(ii) September 1, 2002,
and are employed by other than a state agency or institute of higher education
and who did not choose to enter plan 2; or

(b) Transferred to plan
3 under RCW 41.40.795.

(36) "Index"
means, for any calendar year, that year's annual average consumer price index,
Seattle, Washington area, for urban wage earners and clerical workers, all
items, compiled by the bureau of labor statistics, United States department of
labor.

(37) "Index
A" means the index for the year prior to the determination of a
postretirement adjustment.

(38) "Index
B" means the index for the year prior to index A.

(39) "Index
year" means the earliest calendar year in which the index is more than
sixty percent of index A.

(40) "Adjustment
ratio" means the value of index A divided by index B.

(41) "Annual
increase" means, initially, fifty-nine cents per month per year of service
which amount shall be increased each July 1st by three percent, rounded to the
nearest cent.

(42) "Separation
from service" occurs when a person has terminated all employment with an
employer.

(43) "Member
account" or "member's account" for purposes of plan 3 means the
sum of the contributions and earnings on behalf of the member in the defined
contribution portion of plan 3.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
8. Section 6 of this act
expires March 1, 2002.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 9. Section 7 of this act
takes effect March 1, 2002.

---
END ---