BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF
WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1. RCW 18.104.020 and 2000
c 171 s 26 are each amended to read as follows:

The definitions ((set
forth)) in this section apply throughout this chapter((,)) unless ((a
different meaning is plainly required by)) the context clearly requires
otherwise.

(1) "Abandoned
well" means a well that is unused, unmaintained, and is in such disrepair
as to be unusable.

(2) "Constructing
a well" or "construct a well" means:

(a) Boring, digging,
drilling, or excavating a well;

(b) Installing casing,
sheeting, lining, or well screens, in a well; ((or))

(c) Drilling a
geotechnical soil boring; or

(d) Installing an
environmental investigation well.

"Constructing a
well" or "construct a well" includes the alteration of an
existing well.

(3)
"Decommission" means to fill or plug a well so that it will not
produce water, serve as a channel for movement of water or pollution, or allow
the entry of pollutants into the well or aquifers.

(4)
"Department" means the department of ecology.

(5) "Dewatering
well" means a cased or lined excavation or boring that is intended to
withdraw or divert ground water for the purpose of facilitating construction,
stabilizing a landslide, or protecting an aquifer.

(6)
"Director" means the director of the department of ecology.

(7) "Environmental
investigation well" means a cased hole used to extract a single sample of
ground water, vapor, or soil from an underground formation. An environmental
investigation well is typically installed using direct push technology or auger
boring, uses the probe, stem, or rod as casing, and is decommissioned
immediately after the sample is obtained. An environmental investigation well
is not a geotechnical soil boring.

(8)
"Geotechnical soil boring" or "boring" means ((an uncased))
a well drilled for the purpose of obtaining soil samples or
information to ascertain structural properties of the subsurface. ((Geotechnical
soil boring includes auger borings, rotary borings, cone penetrometer probes
and vane shear probes, or any other uncased ground penetration for geotechnical
information.

(8))) (9) "Ground water" means and
includes ground waters as defined in RCW 90.44.035.

(((9))) (10)
"Instrumentation well" means a well in which pneumatic or electric
geotechnical or hydrological instrumentation is permanently or periodically
installed to measure or monitor subsurface strength and movement.
Instrumentation well includes borehole extensometers, slope indicators,
pneumatic or electric pore pressure transducers, and load cells.

(((10))) (11)
"Monitoring well" means a well designed to obtain a representative
ground water sample or designed to measure the water level elevation in either
clean or contaminated water or soil.

(((11))) (12)
"Observation well" means a well designed to measure the depth to the
water level elevation in either clean or contaminated water or soil.

(((12))) (13)
"Operator" means a person who (a) is employed by a well contractor;
(b) is licensed under this chapter; or (c) who controls, supervises, or oversees
the construction of a well or who operates well construction equipment.

(((13))) (14)
"Owner" or "well owner" means the person, firm,
partnership, copartnership, corporation, association, or other entity who owns
the property on which the well is or will be constructed.

(((14))) (15)
"Pollution" and "contamination" have the meanings provided
in RCW 90.48.020.

(((15))) (16)
"Remediation well" means a well used to withdraw ground water or
inject water, air (for air sparging), or other solutions into the subsurface
for the purpose of remediating, cleaning up, or controlling potential or actual
ground water contamination.

(17)
"Resource protection well" means a cased boring used to collect
subsurface information or to determine the existence or migration of
pollutants within an underground formation. Resource protection wells include
monitoring wells, observation wells, piezometers, spill response wells, remediation
wells, environmental investigation wells, vapor extraction wells, and
instrumentation wells.

(((16))) (18)
"Resource protection well contractor" means any person, firm,
partnership, copartnership, corporation, association, or other entity, licensed
and bonded under chapter 18.27 RCW, engaged in the business of constructing
resource protection wells or geotechnical soil borings.

(((17))) (19)
"Water well" means any excavation that is constructed when the
intended use of the well is for the location, diversion, artificial recharge, observation,
monitoring, dewatering, or withdrawal of ground water.

(((18))) (20)
"Water well contractor" means any person, firm, partnership,
copartnership, corporation, association, or other entity, licensed and bonded
under chapter 18.27 RCW, engaged in the business of constructing water wells.

(((19))) (21)
"Well" means water wells, resource protection wells, ((instrumentation
wells,)) dewatering wells, and geotechnical soil borings. Well does not
mean an excavation made for the purpose of obtaining or prospecting for oil,
natural gas, geothermal resources, minerals, or products of mining, or
quarrying, or for inserting media to repressure oil or natural gas bearing
formations, or for storing petroleum, natural gas, or other products.

(((20))) (22)
"Well contractor" means a resource protection well contractor and a
water well contractor.

Sec. 2. RCW 18.104.055 and 1993
c 387 s 9 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) A fee is hereby
imposed on each well constructed in this state on or after July 1, 1993.

(2)(a) The fee for one
new water well, other than a dewatering well, with a minimum top casing
diameter of less than twelve inches is one hundred dollars.

(b) The fee for one new
water well, other than a dewatering well, with a minimum top casing diameter of
twelve inches or greater is two hundred dollars.

(c) The fee for a new
resource protection((, observation, and monitoring)) well, except for
an environmental investigation well, is forty dollars for each well.

(d) There is a fee
for all environmental investigation wells in which ground water is sampled.
The minimum fee is forty dollars for construction of up to four environmental
investigation wells per project. A ten-dollar fee is required for each
additional environmental investigation well constructed on projects with more
than four wells. No fees may be imposed on environmental investigation wells
used only for soil or vapor sampling purposes.

(e) The combined
fee for construction and decommissioning of a dewatering well system shall be
forty dollars for each two hundred horizontal lineal feet, or portion thereof,
of the dewatering well system.

(3) The
fees imposed by this section shall be paid at the time the notice of well
construction is submitted to the department as provided by RCW 18.104.048. The
department by rule may adopt procedures to permit the fees required for
resource protection wells to be paid after the number of wells actually constructed
has been determined. The department shall refund the amount of any fees
collected for any water wells on which construction is not started. The
fees for resource protection wells are nonrefundable.

---
END ---