BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF
WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1. RCW 70.94.650 and 1998 c
43 s 1 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) Any person who
proposes to set fires in the course of:

(a) Weed abatement;

(b) Instruction in
methods of fire fighting, except training to fight structural fires as provided
in RCW 52.12.150 or training to fight aircraft crash rescue fires as provided
in subsection (5) of this section, and except forest fire training; or

(c) Agricultural
activities,

shall obtain a permit from
an air pollution control authority, the department of ecology, or a local
entity delegated permitting authority under RCW 70.94.654. General permit
criteria of statewide applicability shall be established by the department, by
rule, after consultation with the various air pollution control authorities.
Permits shall be issued under this section based on seasonal operations or by
individual operations, or both. All permits shall be conditioned to ((insure))
ensure that the public interest in air, water, and land pollution and
safety to life and property is fully considered. In addition to any other
requirements established by the department to protect air quality pursuant to
other laws, applicants for permits must show that the setting of fires as
requested is the most reasonable procedure to follow in safeguarding life or
property under all circumstances or is otherwise reasonably necessary to
successfully carry out the enterprise in which the applicant is engaged, or
both. All burning permits will be designed to minimize air pollution insofar
as practical. Nothing in this section shall relieve the applicant from
obtaining permits, licenses, or other approvals required by any other law. An
application for a permit to set fires in the course of agricultural burning for
controlling diseases, insects, weed abatement or development of physiological
conditions conducive to increased crop yield, shall be acted upon within seven
days from the date such application is filed. The department of ecology and
local air authorities shall provide convenient methods for issuance and
oversight of agricultural burning permits. The department and local air
authorities shall, through agreement, work with counties and cities to provide
convenient methods for granting permission for agricultural burning, including
telephone, facsimile transmission, issuance from local city or county offices,
or other methods. A local air authority administering the permit program under
this subsection (1)(c) shall not limit the number of days of allowable
agricultural burning, but may consider the time of year, meteorological conditions,
and other criteria specified in rules adopted by the department to implement
this subsection (1)(c).

(2) Permit fees shall
be assessed for burning under this section and shall be collected by the
department of ecology, the appropriate local air authority, or a local entity
delegated permitting authority pursuant to RCW 70.94.654 at the time the permit
is issued. All fees collected shall be deposited in the air pollution control
account created in RCW 70.94.015, except for that portion of the fee necessary
to cover local costs of administering a permit issued under this section. Fees
shall be set by rule by the permitting agency at the level determined by the
task force created by subsection (4) of this section, but shall not exceed two
dollars and fifty cents per acre to be burned. After fees are established by
rule, any increases in such fees shall be limited to annual inflation
adjustments as determined by the state office of the economic and revenue
forecast council.

(3) Conservation
districts and the Washington State University agricultural extension program in
conjunction with the department shall develop public education material for the
agricultural community identifying the health and environmental effects of agricultural
outdoor burning and providing technical assistance in alternatives to
agricultural outdoor burning.

(4) An agricultural
burning practices and research task force shall be established under the
direction of the department. The task force shall be composed of a
representative from the department who shall serve as chair; one representative
of eastern Washington local air authorities; three representatives of the
agricultural community from different agricultural pursuits; one representative
of the department of agriculture; two representatives from universities or
colleges knowledgeable in agricultural issues; one representative of the public
health or medical community; and one representative of the conservation
districts. The task force shall identify best management practices for
reducing air contaminant emissions from agricultural activities and provide
such information to the department and local air authorities. The task force
shall determine the level of fees to be assessed by the permitting agency
pursuant to subsection (2) of this section, based upon the level necessary to
cover the costs of administering and enforcing the permit programs, to provide
funds for research into alternative methods to reduce emissions from such
burning and into alternatives to such burning, and to the extent
possible be consistent with fees charged for such burning permits in
neighboring states. The fee level shall provide, to the extent possible, for
lesser fees for permittees who use best management practices to minimize air
contaminant emissions. The task force shall identify research needs related to
minimizing emissions from agricultural burning and alternatives to such
burning. Further, the task force shall make recommendations to the department
on priorities for spending funds provided through this chapter for research
into alternative methods to reduce emissions from agricultural burning and
into alternatives to such burning, which alternatives may include but are not
limited to pilot manufacturing projects that use straw as an ingredient in the
manufacturing process. The department may make expenditures for such research.

(5) A permit is not
required under this section, or under RCW 70.94.743 through 70.94.780, from an
air pollution control authority, the department, or any local entity with
delegated permit authority, for aircraft crash rescue fire training activities
meeting the following conditions:

(a) Fire fighters
participating in the training fires must be limited to those who provide fire
fighting support to an airport that is either certified by the federal aviation
administration or operated in support of military or governmental activities;

(b) The fire training
may not be conducted during an air pollution episode or any stage of impaired
air quality declared under RCW 70.94.715 for the area where training is to be
conducted;

(c) The number of
training fires allowed per year without a permit shall be the minimum number
necessary to meet federal aviation administration or other federal safety
requirements;

(d) The facility shall
use current technology and be operated in a manner that will minimize, to the
extent possible, the air contaminants generated during operation; and

(e) Prior to the
commencement of the aircraft fire training, the organization conducting
training shall notify both the: (i) Local fire district or fire department;
and (ii) air pollution control authority, department of ecology, or local
entity delegated permitting authority under RCW 70.94.654, having jurisdiction
within the area where training is to be conducted.

Written approval from
the department or a local air pollution control authority shall be obtained
prior to the initial operation of aircraft crash rescue fire training. Such
approval will be granted to fire training activities meeting the conditions in
this subsection.

(6) Aircraft crash
rescue fire training activities conducted in compliance with ((this))
subsection (5) of this section are not subject to the prohibition, in
RCW 70.94.775(1), of outdoor fires containing petroleum products and are not
considered outdoor burning under RCW 70.94.743 through 70.94.780.

(7) To
provide for fire fighting instruction in instances not governed by subsection
(6) of this section, or other actions to protect public health and safety, the
department or a local air pollution control authority may issue permits that
allow limited burning of prohibited materials listed in RCW 70.94.775(1).

--- END ---