BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF
WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1. RCW 47.52.040 and 1961 c
13 s 47.52.040 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) The highway
authorities of the state, counties and incorporated cities and towns may so
design any limited access facility and so regulate, restrict, or prohibit
access as to best serve the traffic for which such facility is intended; and
the determination of design by such authority shall be conclusive and final.
In this connection such highway authorities may divide and separate any limited
access facility into separate roadways by the construction of raised curbings,
central dividing sections, or other physical separations, or by designating
such separate roadways by signs, markers, stripes, and the proper lane for such
traffic by appropriate signs, markers, stripes and other devices. Except as
provided in subsection (2) of this section, no person shall have any right
of ingress or egress to, from, or across limited access facilities to or from
abutting lands, except at designated points at which access may be permitted by
the highway authorities upon such terms and conditions as may be specified from
time to time: PROVIDED, That any intersecting streets, roads or highways, not
made a part of such facility, shall be deemed closed at the right of way line
by the designation and construction of said facility and without the consent of
any other party or the necessity of any other legal proceeding for such
closing, notwithstanding any laws to the contrary.

(2) The
department shall grant access to a limited access facility for abutting
property owners engaged in the retail sale of agricultural products.

--- END ---