BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF
WASHINGTON:

_5 NEW SECTION. Sec. 1. The legislature finds
that the primary

_6 purpose of the salmon recovery office was the
development of the

_7 statewide salmon recovery strategy for submittal to the

_8 appropriate federal agencies. The legislature further
finds that

_9 since the development and submittal of this strategy has
been

10 accomplished, the remaining tasks of the salmon recovery
office

11 can be accomplished through existing state agencies.
The

12 legislature believes that by relying upon existing state
agencies

13 to accomplish salmon recovery, there will be less
duplication of

14 effort within the executive branch and a corresponding
savings of

15 resources.

16 Sec. 2. RCW
77.85.005 and 1999 sp.s. c 13 s 1 are each amended to

17 read as follows:

p. 1 HB
2207

_1 The legislature finds that repeated attempts to
improve

_2 salmonid fish runs throughout the state of Washington
have failed

_3 to avert listings of salmon and steelhead runs as
threatened or

_4 endangered under the federal endangered species act (16
U.S.C.

_5 Sec. 1531 et seq.). These listings threaten the sport,
commercial,

_6 and tribal fishing industries as well as the economic
well-being

_7 and vitality of vast areas of the state. It is the
intent of the

_8 legislature to begin activities required for the
recovery of

_9 salmon stocks as soon as possible, although the
legislature

10 understands that successful recovery efforts may not be
realized

11 for many years because of the life cycle of salmon and
the complex

12 array of natural and human-caused problems they face.

13 The legislature finds that it is in the interest of
the

14 citizens of the state of Washington for the state to
retain

15 primary responsibility for managing the natural
resources of the

16 state, rather than abdicate those responsibilities to
the federal

17 government, and that the state may best accomplish this
objective

18 by integrating local and regional recovery activities
into a

19 statewide plan that can make the most effective use of
provisions

20 of federal laws allowing for a state lead in salmon
recovery. The

21 legislature also finds that a statewide salmon recovery
plan must

22 be developed and implemented through an active public
involvement

23 process in order to ensure public participation in, and
support

24 for, salmon recovery. The legislature also finds that
there is a

25 substantial link between the provisions of the federal
endangered

26 species act and the federal clean water act (33 U.S.C.
Sec. 1251

27 et seq.). The legislature further finds that habitat
restoration is

28 a vital component of salmon recovery efforts.
Therefore, it is the

29 intent of the legislature to specifically address salmon
habitat

30 restoration in a coordinated manner and to develop a
structure

31 that allows for the coordinated delivery of federal,
state, and

32 local assistance to communities for habitat projects
that will

33 assist in the recovery and enhancement of salmon stocks.

34 The legislature also finds that credible scientific
review and

35 oversight is essential for any salmon recovery effort to
be

36 successful.

37 The legislature further finds that it is important
to monitor

38 the overall health of the salmon resource to determine
if recovery

HB 2207 p. 2

_1 efforts are providing expected returns. It is important
to monitor

_2 salmon habitat projects and salmon recovery activities
to

_3 determine their effectiveness in order to secure federal

_4 acceptance of the state's approach to salmon recovery.
Adaptive

_5 management cannot exist without monitoring. For these
reasons, the

_6 legislature believes that a coordinated and integrated
monitoring

_7 process should be developed.

_8 The legislature therefore finds that a coordinated
framework

_9 for responding to the salmon crisis is needed
immediately. To that

10 end, ((the salmon recovery office should be created
within the

11 governor's office to provide overall coordination of
the state's

12 response;)) an independent science panel is
needed to provide

13 scientific review and oversight; a coordinated state
funding

14 process should be established through a salmon recovery
funding

15 board; the appropriate local or tribal government should
provide

16 local leadership in identifying and sequencing habitat
projects to

17 be funded by state agencies; habitat projects should be

18 implemented without delay; and a strong locally based
effort to

19 restore salmon habitat should be established by
providing a

20 framework to allow citizen volunteers to work
effectively.

21 NEW SECTION. Sec. 3. The
following acts or parts of acts are each

22 repealed:

23 (1) RCW 77.85.030 (Governor's
salmon recovery office‑-Creation‑-

24 Purpose) and 2000 c 107 s 93, 1999 sp.s. c 13 s 8, &
1998 c 246 s

25 5; and

26 (2) RCW 77.85.150 (Statewide
salmon recovery strategy‑-

27 Prospective application) and 1999 sp.s. c 13 s 9.

‑‑‑ END ‑‑‑

p. 3 HB
2207