BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF
WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec.
1. A new section is added
to chapter 46.44 RCW to read as follows:

Consistent operating
procedures are necessary for the safe interaction between escort vehicles, the
escorted load, and the surrounding traffic. Therefore, operators of escort
vehicles must be certified as having received a predefined base level of training
as an escort vehicle operator.

(1) For purposes of
this section, the term "escort vehicle" has the same meaning as the
term pilot car and the terms may be used interchangeably.

(2) All escort vehicle
operators with a Washington state driver's license must have a valid Washington
state escort vehicle operator certificate or card, which must be on the
operator's person while performing escort vehicle operator duties.

(3) Escort vehicle
operators licensed to drive in Washington state and operating with current
certification cards from a different jurisdiction, approved by the department,
must get a Washington state escort vehicle operator's card upon expiration of
their current card, but, in any case, not later than January 1, 2003.

(4) Escort vehicle operators
with a driver's license from a jurisdiction other than Washington state may
acquire a Washington state escort vehicle operator certificate or card, or
operate with a certification from another jurisdiction approved by the
department, subject to ongoing department reviews and approval of the issuing
jurisdiction's certification program.

(5) The department's
motor carrier services office shall maintain a current list of approved escort
vehicle certification programs.

(6) Washington state
escort vehicle operator certificates or cards must be renewed every three
years.

(7) Operators of escort
vehicles for farm vehicles or for timber hauling vehicles are exempt from the
certification process of this section.

(8) When
uniformed off-duty law enforcement officers act as escorts, using official
marked law enforcement vehicles or motorcycles, the requirements of this
section may be modified by the department as necessary.

--- END ---