BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF
WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1. RCW 49.78.010 and 1989
1st ex.s. c 11 s 1 are each amended to read as follows:

The legislature finds
that the demands of the workplace and of families need to be balanced to
promote family stability and economic security. Changes in workplace leave policies
are desirable to accommodate changes in the work force such as rising numbers
of dual-career couples and working single parents. In addition, given the
mobility of American society, many people no longer have available community or
family support networks and therefore need additional flexibility in the
workplace. The legislature declares it to be in the public interest to provide
reasonable ((family leave upon the birth or adoption of a child and to care
for a child under eighteen years old with a terminal health condition)) leave
for medical reasons, for the birth or placement of a child, and for the care of
a family member who has a serious health condition.

Sec. 2. RCW 49.78.020 and 1996 c
178 s 14 are each amended to read as follows:

Unless the context
clearly requires otherwise, the definitions in this section apply throughout
this chapter.

(1) "Child"
means a biological ((or)), adopted, or foster child, ((or))
a stepchild, ((living with the employee)) a legal ward, or a child of
a person standing in loco parentis, who is: (a) Under eighteen years of age;
or (b) eighteen years of age or older and incapable of self‑care because
of a mental or physical disability.

(2)
"Department" means the department of labor and industries.

(3) "Director"
means the director of the department.

(4)(a)
"Employee" means a person ((other than an independent contractor
employed by an employer on a continuous basis for the previous fifty-two weeks
for at least thirty-five hours per week)) who has been employed by the
employer with respect to whom leave is requested under section 3 of this act
for at least six hundred twenty-five hours of service in the previous
twelve-month period.

(b)
"Employee" does not mean a person who is employed at a worksite at
which the employer as defined in subsection (5)(a) of this section employs less
than fifty employees if the total number of employees employed by that employer
within seventy-five miles of that worksite is less than fifty.

(((4))) (5)
"Employer" means: (a) Any person, firm, corporation, partnership,
business trust, legal representative, or other business entity which engages in
any business, industry, profession, or activity in this state and includes any
unit of local government including, but not limited to, a county, city, town,
municipal corporation, quasi-municipal corporation, or political subdivision,
which (((i) employed a daily average of one hundred or more employees during
the last calendar quarter at the place where the employee requesting leave
reports for work, or (ii) employed a daily average of one hundred or more
employees during the last calendar quarter within a twenty mile radius of the
place where the employee requesting leave reports for work, where the employer
maintains a central hiring location and customarily transfers employees among
workplaces)) employs fifty or more employees for each working day during
each of twenty or more calendar workweeks in the current or preceding calendar
year; and (b) the state, state institutions, and state agencies.

(((5) "Family
leave" means leave from employment to care for a newborn or newly adopted
child under the age of six or a child under eighteen years old with a terminal
health condition, as provided in RCW 49.78.030.))

(6) "Employment
benefits" means all benefits provided or made available to employees by an
employer, including group life insurance, health insurance, disability
insurance, sick leave, annual leave, educational benefits, and pensions
regardless of whether such benefits are provided by a practice or written
policy of an employer or through an employee benefit plan as defined in 29
U.S.C. Sec. 1002(3).

(7) "Family
member" means a child, parent, or spouse of an employee.

(8) "Health
care provider" means: (a) A person licensed as a physician under
chapter 18.71 RCW or an osteopathic physician and surgeon under chapter 18.57
RCW; or (b) any other person determined by the director to be capable of
providing health care services.

(((7))) (9)
"Leave for a family member's serious health condition" means leave as
described in section 3(1)(c) of this act.

(10) "Leave for
the birth or placement of a child" means leave as described in section
3(1) (a) or (b) of this act.

(11) "Leave for
the employee's serious health condition" means leave as described in
section 3(1)(d) of this act.

(12)
"Parent" means ((a biological or adoptive parent, or a stepparent))
the biological or adoptive parent of an employee or an individual who stood
in loco parentis to an employee when the employee was a child.

(((8))) (13)
"Reduced leave schedule" means ((leave scheduled for fewer than an
employee's usual number of hours or days per workweek)) a leave schedule
that reduces the usual number of hours per workweek, or hours per workday, of
an employee.

(((9) "Terminal
health condition" means a condition caused by injury, disease, or illness,
that, within reasonable medical judgment, is incurable and will produce death
within the period of leave to which the employee is entitled.))

(14) "Serious
health condition" means an illness, injury, impairment, or physical or
mental condition that involves: (a) Inpatient care in a hospital, hospice, or
residential medical care facility; or (b) continuing treatment by a health care
provider.

(15)
"Spouse" means a husband or wife, as the case may be.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
3. A new section is added
to chapter 49.78 RCW to read as follows:

ENTITLEMENT TO LEAVE.
(1) Subject to section 8 of this act, an employee is entitled to a total of
twelve workweeks of leave during any twelve‑month period for one or more
of the following:

(a) Because of the
birth of a child of the employee and in order to care for such child;

(b) Because of the
placement of a child with the employee for adoption or foster care;

(c) In order to care
for a family member of the employee, if such family member has a serious health
condition; or

(d) Because of a
serious health condition that makes the employee unable to perform the
functions of the position of such employee.

(2) The entitlement to
leave for the birth or placement of a child expires at the end of the twelve‑month
period beginning on the date of such birth or placement.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
4. A new section is added
to chapter 49.78 RCW to read as follows:

LEAVE TAKEN
INTERMITTENTLY OR ON REDUCED LEAVE SCHEDULE. (1) Leave for the birth or
placement of a child may not be taken by an employee intermittently or on a
reduced leave schedule unless the employee and the employer of the employee
agree otherwise. Subject to section 6(2) of this act and section 8(2)(e) of
this act, leave for a family member's serious health condition or the
employee's serious health condition may be taken intermittently or on a reduced
leave schedule when medically necessary. The taking of leave intermittently or
on a reduced leave schedule pursuant to this section may not result in a
reduction in the total amount of leave to which the employee is entitled under
section 3 of this act beyond the amount of leave actually taken.

(2) If an employee
requests intermittent leave, or leave on a reduced leave schedule, for a family
member's serious health condition or the employee's serious health condition
when the condition is foreseeable based on planned medical treatment, the
employer may require such employee to transfer temporarily to an available
alternative position offered by the employer for which the employee is
qualified and that:

(a) Has equivalent pay
and benefits; and

(b) Better accommodates
recurring periods of leave than the regular employment position of the
employee.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
5. A new section is added
to chapter 49.78 RCW to read as follows:

UNPAID LEAVE
PERMITTED--RELATIONSHIP TO PAID LEAVE. (1) Except as provided in subsection
(2) of this section, leave granted under section 3 of this act may consist of
unpaid leave.

(2)(a) If an employer
provides paid leave for fewer than twelve workweeks, the additional weeks of
leave necessary to attain the twelve workweeks of leave required under this
chapter may be provided without compensation.

(b) An employee may
elect, or an employer may require the employee: (i) To substitute any of the
accrued paid vacation leave, personal leave, or family leave of the employee
for leave for the birth or placement of a child or for a family member's
serious health condition for any part of the twelve‑week period of such
leave; or (ii) to substitute any of the accrued paid vacation leave, personal
leave, or medical or sick leave of the employee for leave provided for a family
member's serious health condition or the employee's serious health condition
for any part of the twelve‑week period of such leave, except that nothing
in this chapter shall require an employer to provide paid sick leave or paid
medical leave in any situation in which such employer would not normally
provide any such paid leave.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
6. A new section is added
to chapter 49.78 RCW to read as follows:

FORESEEABLE LEAVE. (1)
If the necessity for leave for the birth or placement of a child is foreseeable
based on an expected birth or placement, the employee shall provide the
employer with not less than thirty days' notice, before the date the leave is
to begin, of the employee's intention to take leave for the birth or placement
of a child, except that if the date of the birth or placement requires leave to
begin in less than thirty days, the employee shall provide such notice as is
practicable.

(2) If the necessity
for leave for a family member's serious health condition or the employee's
serious health condition is foreseeable based on planned medical treatment, the
employee:

(a) Must make a
reasonable effort to schedule the treatment so as not to disrupt unduly the
operations of the employer, subject to the approval of the health care provider
of the employee or the health care provider of the family member, as
appropriate; and

(b) Must provide the
employer with not less than thirty days' notice, before the date the leave is
to begin, of the employee's intention to take leave for a family member's
serious health condition or the employee's serious health condition, except
that if the date of the treatment requires leave to begin in less than thirty
days, the employee must provide such notice as is practicable.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
7. A new section is added
to chapter 49.78 RCW to read as follows:

SPOUSES EMPLOYED BY
SAME EMPLOYER. If a husband and wife entitled to leave under this chapter are
employed by the same employer, the aggregate number of workweeks of leave to
which both may be entitled may be limited to twelve workweeks during any twelve‑month
period, if such leave is taken: (1) For the birth or placement of a child; or
(2) for a parent's serious health condition.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
8. A new section is added
to chapter 49.78 RCW to read as follows:

CERTIFICATION. (1) An
employer may require that a request for leave for a family member's serious
health condition or the employee's serious health condition be supported by a
certification issued by the health care provider of the employee or of the
family member, as appropriate. The employee must provide, in a timely manner,
a copy of such certification to the employer.

(2) Certification
provided under subsection (1) of this section is sufficient if it states:

(a) The date on which
the serious health condition commenced;

(b) The probable
duration of the condition;

(c) The appropriate
medical facts within the knowledge of the health care provider regarding the
condition;

(d)(i) For purposes of
leave for a family member's serious health condition, a statement that the
employee is needed to care for the family member and an estimate of the amount
of time that such employee is needed to care for the family member; and

(ii) For purposes of
leave for the employee's serious health condition, a statement that the
employee is unable to perform the functions of the position of the employee;

(e) In the case of
certification for intermittent leave, or leave on a reduced leave schedule, for
planned medical treatment, the dates on which such treatment is expected to be
given and the duration of such treatment;

(f) In the case of
certification for intermittent leave, or leave on a reduced leave schedule, for
the employee's serious health condition, a statement of the medical necessity
for the intermittent leave or leave on a reduced leave schedule, and the
expected duration of the intermittent leave or reduced leave schedule; and

(g) In the case of
certification for intermittent leave, or leave on a reduced leave schedule, for
a family member's serious health condition, a statement that the employee's
intermittent leave or leave on a reduced leave schedule is necessary for the
care of the family member who has a serious health condition, or will assist in
their recovery, and the expected duration and schedule of the intermittent
leave or reduced leave schedule.

(3) If the employer has
reason to doubt the validity of the certification provided under subsection (1)
of this section for leave for a family member's serious health condition or the
employee's serious health condition, the employer may require, at the expense
of the employer, that the employee obtain the opinion of a second health care
provider designated or approved by the employer concerning any information
certified under subsection (2) of this section for such leave. The second
health care provider may not be employed on a regular basis by the employer.

(4) If the second
opinion described in subsection (3) of this section differs from the opinion in
the original certification provided under subsection (1) of this section, the employer
may require, at the expense of the employer, that the employee obtain the
opinion of a third health care provider designated or approved jointly by the
employer and the employee concerning the information certified under subsection
(2) of this section. The opinion of the third health care provider concerning
the information certified under subsection (2) of this section is considered to
be final and is binding on the employer and the employee.

(5) The employer may
require that the employee obtain subsequent recertifications on a reasonable
basis.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
9. A new section is added
to chapter 49.78 RCW to read as follows:

EMPLOYMENT PROTECTION.
(1)(a) Except as provided in (b) of this subsection, any employee who takes
leave under section 3 of this act for the intended purpose of the leave is
entitled, on return from such leave:

(i) To be restored by
the employer to the position of employment held by the employee when the leave
commenced; or

(ii) To be restored to
an equivalent position with equivalent employment benefits, pay, and other
terms and conditions of employment at a workplace within twenty miles of the
employee's workplace when leave commenced.

(b) The taking of leave
under section 3 of this act may not result in the loss of any employment
benefits accrued prior to the date on which the leave commenced.

(c) Nothing in this
section entitles any restored employee to:

(i) The accrual of any
seniority or employment benefits during any period of leave; or

(ii) Any right,
benefit, or position of employment other than any right, benefit, or position
to which the employee would have been entitled had the employee not taken the
leave.

(d) As a condition of
restoration under (a) of this subsection for an employee who has taken leave
for the employee's serious health condition, the employer may have a uniformly
applied practice or policy that requires each such employee to receive
certification from the health care provider of the employee that the employee
is able to resume work, except that nothing in this subsection (1)(d)
supersedes a valid local law or a collective bargaining agreement that governs
the return to work of such employees.

(e) Nothing in this
subsection (1) prohibits an employer from requiring an employee on leave to
report periodically to the employer on the status and intention of the employee
to return to work.

(2) An employer may
deny restoration under subsection (1) of this section to any salaried employee
who is among the highest paid ten percent of the employees employed by the
employer within seventy-five miles of the facility at which the employee is
employed if:

(a) Such denial is
necessary to prevent substantial and grievous economic injury to the operations
of the employer;

(b) The employer
notifies the employee of the intent of the employer to deny restoration on such
basis at the time the employer determines that such injury would occur; and

(c) If the leave has
commenced, the employee elects not to return to employment after receiving such
notice.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
10. A new section is added
to chapter 49.78 RCW to read as follows:

EMPLOYMENT BENEFITS.
During any period of leave taken under section 3 of this act, if the employee
is not eligible for any employer contribution to medical or dental benefits
under an applicable collective bargaining agreement or employer policy during
any period of leave, an employer shall allow the employee to continue, at his
or her own expense, medical or dental insurance coverage, including any spouse
and dependent coverage, in accordance with state or federal law. The premium
to be paid by the employee shall not exceed one hundred two percent of the
applicable premium for the leave period.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
11. A new section is added
to chapter 49.78 RCW to read as follows:

PROHIBITED ACTS. (1)
It is unlawful for any employer:

(a) To interfere with,
restrain, or deny the exercise of, or the attempt to exercise, any right
provided under this chapter; or

(b) To discharge or in
any other manner discriminate against any individual for opposing any practice
made unlawful by this chapter.

(2) It is unlawful for
any person to discharge or in any other manner discriminate against any
individual because such individual:

(a) Has filed any
charge, or has instituted or caused to be instituted any proceeding, under or
related to this chapter;

(b) Has given, or is
about to give, any information in connection with any inquiry or proceeding
relating to any right provided under this chapter; or

(c) Has testified, or
is about to testify, in any inquiry or proceeding relating to any right
provided under this chapter.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
12. A new section is added
to chapter 49.78 RCW to read as follows:

INVESTIGATIVE
AUTHORITY. (1) To ensure compliance with the provisions of this chapter, or
any rule adopted under this chapter, the director shall have, subject to
subsection (3) of this section, the investigative authority provided under RCW
49.46.040(1).

(2) Any employer shall
make, keep, and preserve records pertaining to compliance with this chapter in
accordance with RCW 49.46.040(3) and in accordance with rules adopted by the
director.

(3) The director may
not under the authority of this section require any employer to submit to the
director any books or records more than once during any twelve‑month
period, unless the director has reasonable cause to believe there may exist a
violation of this chapter or any regulation or order issued pursuant to this
chapter, or is investigating a complaint pursuant to section 14 of this act.

(4) For the purposes of
any investigation provided for in this section, the director may issue
subpoenas to compel the attendance of witnesses or parties and the production
of books, papers, or records.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
13. A new section is added
to chapter 49.78 RCW to read as follows:

CIVIL ACTION BY
EMPLOYEES. (1) Any employer who violates section 11 of this act is liable:

(a) For damages equal
to:

(i) The amount of:

(A) Any wages, salary,
employment benefits, or other compensation denied or lost to such employee by
reason of the violation; or

(B) In a case in which
wages, salary, employment benefits, or other compensation have not been denied
or lost to the employee, any actual monetary losses sustained by the employee
as a direct result of the violation, such as the cost of providing care, up to
a sum equal to twelve weeks of wages or salary for the employee;

(ii) The interest on
the amount described in (a)(i) of this subsection calculated at the prevailing
rate; and

(iii) An additional
amount as liquidated damages equal to the sum of the amount described in (a)(i)
of this subsection and the interest described in (a)(ii) of this subsection,
except that if an employer who has violated section 11 of this act proves to
the satisfaction of the court that the act or omission which violated section
11 of this act was in good faith and that the employer had reasonable grounds
for believing that the act or omission was not a violation of section 11 of
this act, such court may, in the discretion of the court, reduce the amount of
the liability to the amount and interest determined under (a)(i) and (ii) of
this subsection, respectively; and

(b) For such equitable
relief as may be appropriate, including employment, reinstatement, and
promotion.

(2) An action to
recover the damages or equitable relief prescribed in subsection (1) of this
section may be maintained against any employer in any court of competent
jurisdiction by any one or more employees for and in behalf of:

(a) The employees; or

(b) The employees and
other employees similarly situated.

(3) The court in such
an action shall, in addition to any judgment awarded to the plaintiff, allow
reasonable attorneys' fees, reasonable expert witness fees, and other costs of
the action to be paid by the defendant.

(4) Unless the action
described in (a) or (b) of this subsection is dismissed without prejudice on
motion of the director, the right provided by subsection (2) of this section to
bring an action by or on behalf of any employee shall terminate:

(a) On the filing of a
complaint by the director in an action under section 14 of this act in which
restraint is sought of any further delay in the payment of the amount described
in subsection (1)(a) of this section to such employee by an employer
responsible under subsection (1) of this section for the payment; or

(b) On the filing of a
complaint by the director in an action under section 14 of this act in which a
recovery is sought of the damages described in subsection (1)(a) of this
section owing to an employee by an employer liable under subsection (1) of this
section.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
14. A new section is added
to chapter 49.78 RCW to read as follows:

AGENCY ACTION. (1) The
director shall receive, investigate, and attempt to resolve complaints of
violations of section 11 of this act in the same manner that the director
receives, investigates, and attempts to resolve complaints of violations of RCW
49.46.020 and 49.46.130. The director may bring an action in superior court to
recover the damages described in section 13 of this act.

(2) Except as provided
in this subsection, an action may be brought under this section within two
years of the date of the last event constituting the alleged violation for
which the action is brought. In the case of such action brought for a willful
violation of section 11 of this act, such action may be brought within three
years of the date of the last event constituting the alleged violation for
which such action is brought. In determining when an action is commenced by
the director under this section for the purposes of this subsection, it is
considered to be commenced on the date when the complaint is filed.

(3) The director also
may bring an action in superior court:

(a) To restrain
violations of section 11 of this act, including the restraint of any
withholding of payment of wages, salary, employment benefits, or other
compensation, plus interest, found by the court to be due to eligible
employees; or

(b) To award such other
equitable relief as may be appropriate, including employment, reinstatement,
and promotion.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
15. A new section is added
to chapter 49.78 RCW to read as follows:

NOTICE. Each employer
shall post and keep posted, in conspicuous places on the premises of the
employer where notices to employees and applicants for employment are
customarily posted, a notice, to be prepared or approved by the director,
setting forth excerpts from, or summaries of, the pertinent provisions of this
chapter and information pertaining to the filing of a charge. Any employer
that willfully violates this section may be subject to a civil penalty of not
more than one hundred dollars for each separate offense.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
16. A new section is added
to chapter 49.78 RCW to read as follows:

FAMILY AND MEDICAL
LEAVE ENFORCEMENT ACCOUNT. The family and medical leave enforcement account is
created in the custody of the state treasurer. Any sums recovered by the
director pursuant to section 14 of this act shall be deposited into the account
and shall be paid to each employee affected. Any such sums not paid to an
employee because of inability to do so within a period of three years shall be
used only for the purposes of administering and enforcing this chapter. Any
penalties collected under section 15 of this act shall be deposited into the
account and shall be used only for the purposes of administering and enforcing
this chapter. Only the director or the director's designee may authorize
expenditures from the account. The account is subject to allotment procedures
under chapter 43.88 RCW, but an appropriation is not required for expenditures.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
17. A new section is added
to chapter 49.78 RCW to read as follows:

EFFECT ON OTHER LAWS.
Nothing in this chapter shall be construed: (1) To modify or affect any state
or local law prohibiting discrimination on the basis of race, religion, color,
national origin, sex, age, or disability; or (2) to supersede any provision of
any local law that provides greater family or medical leave rights than the
rights established under this chapter.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
18. A new section is added
to chapter 49.78 RCW to read as follows:

EFFECT ON EXISTING
EMPLOYMENT BENEFITS. Nothing in this chapter diminishes the obligation of an
employer to comply with any collective bargaining agreement or any employment
benefit program or plan that provides greater family or medical leave rights to
employees than the rights established under this chapter. The rights
established for employees under this chapter may not be diminished by any
collective bargaining agreement or any employment benefit program or plan.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
19. A new section is added
to chapter 49.78 RCW to read as follows:

ENCOURAGEMENT OF MORE
GENEROUS LEAVE POLICIES. Nothing in this chapter shall be construed to
discourage employers from adopting or retaining leave policies more generous
than any policies that comply with the requirements under this chapter.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
20. A new section is added
to chapter 49.78 RCW to read as follows:

(1) Leave under this
chapter and leave under the federal family and medical leave act of 1993 (Act
Feb. 5, 1993, P.L. 103-3, 107 Stat. 6) is in addition to any leave for sickness
or temporary disability because of pregnancy or childbirth.

(2) Leave taken under
this chapter must be taken concurrently with any leave taken under the federal
family and medical leave act of 1993 (Act Feb. 5, 1993, P.L. 103-3, 107 Stat.
6).

NEW SECTION. Sec.
21. A new section is added to
chapter 49.78 RCW to read as follows:

RULE-MAKING AUTHORITY.
The director shall adopt rules as necessary to implement this chapter.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
22. A new section is added
to chapter 49.78 RCW to read as follows:

CONSTRUCTION. This
chapter must be construed to the extent possible in a manner that is consistent
with similar provisions, if any, of the federal family and medical leave act of
1993 (Act Feb. 5, 1993, P.L. 103-3, 107 Stat. 6), and that gives consideration
to the rules, precedents, and practices of the federal department of labor
relevant to the federal act.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
23. The following acts or
parts of acts are each repealed:

(1) RCW 49.78.005 (Administration and
enforcement of this chapter to cease while federal family and medical leave act
provides the same or more family leave--Rights under RCW 49.78.070(1)(b)
preserved--Enforcement) and 1997 c 16 s 1;

(2) RCW 49.78.030 (Requirements--Limitation)
and 1989 1st ex.s. c 11 s 3;

(3) RCW 49.78.040 (Notice to employer) and
1989 1st ex.s. c 11 s 4;

(4) RCW 49.78.050 (Requirements for
confirmation--Second opinion) and 1989 1st ex.s. c 11 s 5;

(5) RCW 49.78.060 (Both parents with same
employer) and 1989 1st ex.s. c 11 s 6;

(6) RCW 49.78.070 (Employee employment
rights--Limitations) and 1989 1st ex.s. c 11 s 7;

(7) RCW 49.78.080 (Employee benefits) and
1989 1st ex.s. c 11 s 8;

(8) RCW 49.78.100 (Additional
rights--Remedies) and 1989 1st ex.s. c 11 s 10;

(9) RCW 49.78.110 (Collective bargaining
agreements--Obligations and rights not diminished) and 1989 1st ex.s. c 11 s
11;

(10) RCW 49.78.120 (Collective bargaining
agreements--Application of chapter--Grievance procedures) and 1989 1st ex.s. c
11 s 12;

(11) RCW 49.78.130 (Discrimination
prohibited) and 1989 1st ex.s. c 11 s 13;

(12) RCW 49.78.140
(Complaint--Contents--Notice--Investigation) and 1989 1st ex.s. c 11 s 14;

(13) RCW 49.78.150 (Notice of
infraction--Contents) and 1989 1st ex.s. c 11 s 15;

(14) RCW 49.78.160 (Notice of
infraction--Service) and 1989 1st ex.s. c 11 s 16;

(15) RCW 49.78.170 (Notice of infraction--State
agencies) and 1989 1st ex.s. c 11 s 17;

(16) RCW 49.78.180
(Appeal--Hearings--Decisions--Review--Appeal of final decision) and 1989 1st
ex.s. c 11 s 18;

(17) RCW 49.78.190 (Penalties) and 1989 1st
ex.s. c 11 s 19; and

(18) RCW 49.78.200 (Poster required) and 1989
1st ex.s. c 11 s 20.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
24. If any provision of this
act or its application to any person or circumstance is held invalid, the
remainder of the act or the application of the provision to other persons or
circumstances is not affected.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 25. Captions used in this act
are not any part of the law.

---
END ---