BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF
WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec.
1. A new section is added
to chapter 7.68 RCW to read as follows:

(1) The department
shall:

(a) Establish and administer
partial wage replacement benefits for victims of domestic violence or stalking
as specified in this section, to be known as the domestic violence and stalking
victims' compensation benefit;

(b) Pay benefits to
victims of domestic violence or stalking from the public safety and education
account;

(c) Establish
procedures and forms for filing claims for benefits; and

(d) Provide information
to claimants for benefits regarding the availability of protection orders under
chapter 26.50 RCW and local services provided under chapter 70.123 RCW.

(2) Benefits under this
section are payable to a victim of domestic violence or stalking if he or she:

(a) Has been employed
in employment covered under Title 50 RCW for at least six hundred eighty hours
in the first four of the last five completed calendar quarters or the last four
completed calendar quarters immediately before the date of application for
benefits;

(b) Is unemployed
because of the need to protect the victim of domestic violence or stalking or his
or her immediate family members from the risk of domestic violence or stalking;

(c) Is residing at an
address different than that of the perpetrator;

(d) Has filed a police
report or obtained a restraining order against the perpetrator within two years
before the date of application for benefits;

(e) Files a claim for
benefits as required by rules adopted by the director; and

(f) Consents to the
disclosure of information or records deemed private and confidential under
chapter 50.13 RCW. Initial disclosure of this information and these records by
the employment security department to the department is solely for purposes
related to the administration of this section. Further disclosure of this
information or these records is subject to RCW 7.68.140, 7.68.145, and section
9 of this act.

(3) Benefits under this
section are payable as follows:

(a) Benefits are
payable in an amount calculated in the same manner that a weekly benefit amount
is calculated under chapter 50.20 RCW;

(b) Benefits are payable
during no more than twelve weeks in a calendar year or no more than seven weeks
in a calendar year if the separation from employment is covered under RCW
50.20.050(4);

(c) Benefits are not
payable for any weeks in which compensation for a permanent total disability or
temporary total disability is paid or payable to the victim of domestic
violence or stalking under the crime victims' compensation benefit under this
chapter, or under Title 51 RCW or another state or federal workers'
compensation law; and

(d) Benefits are not
payable for any weeks in which the separation from employment is covered under
Title 50 RCW or another state or federal unemployment compensation law, except
for any weeks in the waiting period under RCW 50.20.050(4) or a comparable provision
in another state or federal unemployment compensation law.

(4) Benefits under this
section are payable only to the extent that moneys are available in the public
safety and education account. Neither the state nor the department is liable
for any amount in excess of these limits.

(5) This section does
not create a continuing entitlement or contractual right. The legislature
reserves the right to amend or repeal all or part of this section at any time,
and a benefit or other right granted under this section exists subject to the
legislature's power to amend or repeal this chapter. There is no vested
private right of any kind against such amendment or repeal.

Sec. 2. RCW 7.68.015 and 1989
1st ex.s. c 5 s 1 are each amended to read as follows:

The department ((of
labor and industries)) shall operate the crime victims' compensation
program and the domestic violence and stalking victims' compensation benefit
within the appropriations and the conditions and limitations on the
appropriations provided for ((this)) these programs.

Sec. 3. RCW 7.68.020 and 1997 c
249 s 1 are each amended to read as follows:

The following words and
phrases as used in this chapter have the meanings set forth in this section
unless the context otherwise requires.

(1)
"Department" means the department of labor and industries.

(2) "Criminal
act" means an act committed or attempted in this state which is punishable
as a felony or gross misdemeanor under the laws of this state, or an act
committed outside the state of Washington against a resident of the state of
Washington which would be compensable had it occurred inside this state; and
the crime occurred in a state which does not have a crime victims compensation
program, for which the victim is eligible as set forth in the Washington
compensation law, or an act of terrorism as defined in 18 U.S.C. Sec. 2331, as
it exists on May 2, 1997, committed outside of the United States against a
resident of the state of Washington, except as follows:

(a) The operation of a
motor vehicle, motorcycle, train, boat, or aircraft in violation of law does
not constitute a "criminal act" unless:

(i) The injury or death
was intentionally inflicted;

(ii) The operation
thereof was part of the commission of another non-vehicular criminal act as
defined in this section;

(iii) The death or
injury was the result of the operation of a motor vehicle after July 24, 1983,
and a preponderance of the evidence establishes that the death was the result
of vehicular homicide under RCW 46.61.520, or a conviction of vehicular assault
under RCW 46.61.522, has been obtained: PROVIDED, That in cases where a
probable criminal defendant has died in perpetration of vehicular assault or,
because of physical or mental infirmity or disability the perpetrator is
incapable of standing trial for vehicular assault, the department may, by a
preponderance of the evidence, establish that a vehicular assault had been
committed and authorize benefits; or

(iv) Injury or death
caused by a driver in violation of RCW 46.61.502;

(b) Neither an
acquittal in a criminal prosecution nor the absence of any such prosecution is
admissible in any claim or proceeding under this chapter as evidence of the
noncriminal character of the acts giving rise to such claim or proceeding,
except as provided for in subsection (2)(a)(iii) of this section;

(c) Evidence of a
criminal conviction arising from acts which are the basis for a claim or
proceeding under this chapter is admissible in such claim or proceeding for the
limited purpose of proving the criminal character of the acts; and

(d) Acts which, but for
the insanity or mental irresponsibility of the perpetrator, would constitute
criminal conduct are deemed to be criminal conduct within the meaning of this
chapter.

(3) "Victim"
means a person who suffers bodily injury or death as a proximate result of a
criminal act of another person, the victim's own good faith and reasonable
effort to prevent a criminal act, or his good faith effort to apprehend a
person reasonably suspected of engaging in a criminal act. For the purposes of
receiving benefits pursuant to this chapter, "victim" is
interchangeable with "employee" or "workman" as defined in
chapter 51.08 RCW as now or hereafter amended.

(4) "Victim of
domestic violence or stalking" means a person who was a victim of domestic
violence, as defined in RCW 26.50.010, or stalking, as defined in RCW
9A.46.110, within two years before the date of application for benefits under
section 1 of this act.

(5)
"Child," "accredited school," "dependent,"
"beneficiary," "average monthly wage,"
"director," "injury," "invalid," "permanent
partial disability," and "permanent total disability" have the
meanings assigned to them in chapter 51.08 RCW as now or hereafter amended.

(((5))) (6)
"Gainfully employed" means engaging on a regular and continuous basis
in a lawful activity from which a person derives a livelihood.

(((6))) (7)
"Private insurance" means any source of recompense provided by
contract available as a result of the claimed injury or death at the time of
such injury or death, or which becomes available any time thereafter.

(((7))) (8)
"Public insurance" means any source of recompense provided by
statute, state or federal, available as a result of the claimed injury or death
at the time of such injury or death, or which becomes available any time
thereafter.

Sec. 4. RCW 7.68.030 and 1989
1st ex.s. c 5 s 2 are each amended to read as follows:

It shall be the duty of
the director to establish and administer a program of benefits to innocent
victims of criminal acts, to be known as the crime victims' compensation
program, within the terms and limitations of this chapter. In so doing,
the director shall, in accordance with chapter 34.05 RCW, adopt rules and
regulations necessary to the administration of this chapter, and the provisions
contained in chapter 51.04 RCW, including but not limited to RCW 51.04.020,
51.04.030, 51.04.040, 51.04.050 and 51.04.100 as now or hereafter amended,
shall apply where appropriate in keeping with the intent of this chapter. The
director may apply for and, subject to appropriation, expend federal funds
under Public Law 98-473 and any other federal program providing financial
assistance to state crime victim compensation programs. The federal funds
shall be deposited in the public safety and education account in the general
fund and may be expended only for purposes authorized by applicable federal
law.

Sec. 5. RCW 7.68.060 and 1996 c
122 s 4 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) For the purposes of
applying for benefits from the crime victims' compensation program under
this chapter, the rights, privileges, responsibilities, duties, limitations and
procedures contained in RCW 51.28.020, 51.28.030, 51.28.040 and 51.28.060 shall
apply: PROVIDED, That no compensation of any kind shall be available under
this chapter if:

(a) An application for
benefits is not received by the department within two years after the date the
criminal act was reported to a local police department or sheriff's office or
the date the rights of dependents or beneficiaries accrued, unless the director
has determined that "good cause" exists to expand the time permitted
to receive the application. "Good cause" shall be determined by the
department on a case-by-case basis and may extend the period of time in which
an application can be received for up to five years after the date the criminal
act was reported to a local police department or sheriff's office or the date
the rights of dependents or beneficiaries accrued; or

(b) The criminal act is
not reported by the victim or someone on his or her behalf to a local police
department or sheriff's office within twelve months of its occurrence or, if it
could not reasonably have been reported within that period, within twelve
months of the time when a report could reasonably have been made. In making
determinations as to reasonable time limits, the department shall give greatest
weight to the needs of the victims.

(2) This section
does not apply to the domestic violence and stalking victims' compensation
benefit under section 1 of this act.

(3) This section
shall apply only to criminal acts reported after December 31, 1985.

(((3))) (4)
Because victims of childhood criminal acts may repress conscious memory of such
criminal acts far beyond the age of eighteen, the rights of adult victims of childhood
criminal acts shall accrue at the time the victim discovers or reasonably
should have discovered the elements of the crime. In making determinations as
to reasonable time limits, the department shall give greatest weight to the
needs of the victim.

Sec. 6. RCW 7.68.070 and 1996 c
122 s 5 are each amended to read as follows:

The right to benefits from
the crime victims' compensation program under this chapter and the amount
thereof will be governed insofar as is applicable by the provisions contained
in chapter 51.32 RCW except as provided in this section:

(1) The provisions
contained in RCW 51.32.015, 51.32.030, 51.32.072, 51.32.073, 51.32.180,
51.32.190, and 51.32.200 are not applicable to this chapter.

(2) Each victim injured
as a result of a criminal act, including criminal acts committed between July
1, 1981, and January 1, 1983, or the victim's family or dependents in case of
death of the victim, are entitled to benefits in accordance with this chapter,
subject to the limitations under RCW 7.68.015. The rights, duties,
responsibilities, limitations, and procedures applicable to a worker as
contained in RCW 51.32.010 are applicable to this chapter.

(3) The limitations
contained in RCW 51.32.020 are applicable to claims under this chapter. In
addition thereto, no person or spouse, child, or dependent of such person is
entitled to benefits under this chapter when the injury for which benefits are
sought, was:

(a) The result of
consent, provocation, or incitement by the victim, unless an injury resulting
from a criminal act caused the death of the victim;

(b) Sustained while the
crime victim was engaged in the attempt to commit, or the commission of, a
felony; or

(c) Sustained while the
victim was confined in any county or city jail, federal jail or prison or in
any other federal institution, or any state correctional institution maintained
and operated by the department of social and health services or the department
of corrections, prior to release from lawful custody; or confined or living in
any other institution maintained and operated by the department of social and
health services or the department of corrections.

(4) The benefits
established upon the death of a worker and contained in RCW 51.32.050 shall be
the benefits obtainable under this chapter and provisions relating to payment
contained in that section shall equally apply under this chapter: PROVIDED,
That benefits for burial expenses shall not exceed the amount paid by the
department in case of the death of a worker as provided in chapter 51.32 RCW in
any claim: PROVIDED FURTHER, That if the criminal act results in the death of
a victim who was not gainfully employed at the time of the criminal act, and
who was not so employed for at least three consecutive months of the twelve
months immediately preceding the criminal act;

(a) Benefits payable to
an eligible surviving spouse, where there are no children of the victim at the
time of the criminal act who have survived the victim or where such spouse has
legal custody of all of his or her children, shall be limited to burial
expenses and a lump sum payment of seven thousand five hundred dollars without
reference to number of children, if any;

(b) Where any such
spouse has legal custody of one or more but not all of such children, then such
burial expenses shall be paid, and such spouse shall receive a lump sum payment
of three thousand seven hundred fifty dollars and any such child or children
not in the legal custody of such spouse shall receive a lump sum of three
thousand seven hundred fifty dollars to be divided equally among such child or
children;

(c) If any such spouse
does not have legal custody of any of the children, the burial expenses shall
be paid and the spouse shall receive a lump sum payment of up to three thousand
seven hundred fifty dollars and any such child or children not in the legal
custody of the spouse shall receive a lump sum payment of up to three thousand
seven hundred fifty dollars to be divided equally among the child or children;

(d) If no such spouse
survives, then such burial expenses shall be paid, and each surviving child of
the victim at the time of the criminal act shall receive a lump sum payment of
three thousand seven hundred fifty dollars up to a total of two such children
and where there are more than two such children the sum of seven thousand five
hundred dollars shall be divided equally among such children.

No other benefits may
be paid or payable under these circumstances.

(5) The benefits
established in RCW 51.32.060 for permanent total disability proximately caused
by the criminal act shall be the benefits obtainable under this chapter, and
provisions relating to payment contained in that section apply under this
chapter: PROVIDED, That if a victim becomes permanently and totally disabled
as a proximate result of the criminal act and was not gainfully employed at the
time of the criminal act, the victim shall receive monthly during the period of
the disability the following percentages, where applicable, of the average
monthly wage determined as of the date of the criminal act pursuant to RCW
51.08.018:

(a) If married at the
time of the criminal act, twenty-nine percent of the average monthly wage.

(b) If married with one
child at the time of the criminal act, thirty-four percent of the average
monthly wage.

(c) If married with two
children at the time of the criminal act, thirty-eight percent of the average
monthly wage.

(d) If married with
three children at the time of the criminal act, forty-one percent of the
average monthly wage.

(e) If married with
four children at the time of the criminal act, forty-four percent of the
average monthly wage.

(f) If married with
five or more children at the time of the criminal act, forty-seven percent of
the average monthly wage.

(g) If unmarried at the
time of the criminal act, twenty-five percent of the average monthly wage.

(h) If unmarried with
one child at the time of the criminal act, thirty percent of the average
monthly wage.

(i) If unmarried with
two children at the time of the criminal act, thirty-four percent of the
average monthly wage.

(j) If unmarried with
three children at the time of the criminal act, thirty-seven percent of the
average monthly wage.

(k) If unmarried with
four children at the time of the criminal act, forty percent of the average
monthly wage.

(l) If unmarried with
five or more children at the time of the criminal act, forty-three percent of
the average monthly wage.

(6) The benefits
established in RCW 51.32.080 for permanent partial disability shall be the
benefits obtainable under this chapter, and provisions relating to payment
contained in that section equally apply under this chapter.

(7) The benefits
established in RCW 51.32.090 for temporary total disability shall be the
benefits obtainable under this chapter, and provisions relating to payment
contained in that section apply under this chapter: PROVIDED, That no person
is eligible for temporary total disability benefits under this chapter if such
person was not gainfully employed at the time of the criminal act, and was not
so employed for at least three consecutive months of the twelve months
immediately preceding the criminal act.

(8) The benefits
established in RCW 51.32.095 for continuation of benefits during vocational
rehabilitation shall be benefits obtainable under this chapter, and provisions
relating to payment contained in that section apply under this chapter:
PROVIDED, That benefits shall not exceed five thousand dollars for any single
injury.

(9) The provisions for
lump sum payment of benefits upon death or permanent total disability as
contained in RCW 51.32.130 apply under this chapter.

(10) The provisions
relating to payment of benefits to, for or on behalf of workers contained in
RCW 51.32.040, 51.32.055, 51.32.100, 51.32.110, 51.32.120, 51.32.135,
51.32.140, 51.32.150, 51.32.160, and 51.32.210 are applicable to payment of
benefits to, for or on behalf of victims under this chapter.

(11) No person or
spouse, child, or dependent of such person is entitled to benefits under this
chapter where the person making a claim for such benefits has refused to give
reasonable cooperation to state or local law enforcement agencies in their
efforts to apprehend and convict the perpetrator(s) of the criminal act which
gave rise to the claim.

(12) In addition to
other benefits provided under this chapter, victims of sexual assault are
entitled to receive appropriate counseling. Fees for such counseling shall be
determined by the department in accordance with RCW 51.04.030, subject to the
limitations of RCW 7.68.080. Counseling services may include, if determined
appropriate by the department, counseling of members of the victim's immediate
family, other than the perpetrator of the assault.

(13) Except for medical
benefits authorized under RCW 7.68.080, no more than thirty thousand dollars
shall be granted as a result of a single injury or death, except that benefits
granted as the result of total permanent disability or death shall not exceed
forty thousand dollars.

(14) Notwithstanding
other provisions of this chapter and Title 51 RCW, benefits payable for total
temporary disability under subsection (7) of this section, shall be limited to
fifteen thousand dollars.

(15) Any person who is
responsible for the victim's injuries, or who would otherwise be unjustly
enriched as a result of the victim's injuries, shall not be a beneficiary under
this chapter.

(16) Crime victims'
compensation is not available to pay for services covered under chapter 74.09
RCW or Title XIX of the federal social security act, except to the extent that
the costs for such services exceed service limits established by the department
of social and health services or, during the 1993-95 fiscal biennium, to the extent
necessary to provide matching funds for federal medicaid reimbursement.

(17) In addition to
other benefits provided under this chapter, immediate family members of a
homicide victim may receive appropriate counseling to assist in dealing with
the immediate, near-term consequences of the related effects of the homicide.
Fees for counseling shall be determined by the department in accordance with
RCW 51.04.030, subject to the limitations of RCW 7.68.080. Payment of
counseling benefits under this section may not be provided to the perpetrator
of the homicide. The benefits under this subsection may be provided only with
respect to homicides committed on or after July 1, 1992.

(18) This section
does not apply to the domestic violence and stalking victims' compensation
benefit under section 1 of this act.

Sec. 7. RCW 7.68.140 and 1997 c
310 s 1 are each amended to read as follows:

Information contained
in the claim files and records of victims and victims of domestic violence
or stalking, under the provisions of this chapter, shall be deemed
confidential and shall not be open to public inspection: PROVIDED, That,
except as limited by state or federal statutes or regulations, such information
may be provided to public employees in the performance of their official
duties: PROVIDED FURTHER, That except as otherwise limited by state or federal
statutes or regulations a claimant or a representative of a claimant, be it an
individual or an organization, may review a claim file or receive specific
information therefrom upon the presentation of the signed authorization of the
claimant: PROVIDED FURTHER, That physicians treating or examining victims
claiming benefits under this chapter or physicians giving medical advice to the
department regarding any claim may, at the discretion of the department and as
not otherwise limited by state or federal statutes or regulations, inspect the
claim files and records of such victims, and other persons may, when rendering
assistance to the department at any stage of the proceedings on any matter
pertaining to the administration of this chapter, inspect the claim files and
records of such victims at the discretion of the department and as not
otherwise limited by state or federal statutes or regulations.

Sec. 8. RCW 7.68.145 and 1975
1st ex.s. c 176 s 7 are each amended to read as follows:

Notwithstanding any
other provision of law, all law enforcement, criminal justice, or other
governmental agencies, or hospital; any physician or other practitioner of the
healing arts; or any other organization or person having possession or control
of any investigative or other information pertaining to any alleged criminal
act or victim or victim of domestic violence or stalking concerning
which a claim for benefits has been filed under this chapter, shall, upon
request, make available to and allow the reproduction of any such information
by the section of the department administering this chapter or other public
employees in their performance of their official duties under this chapter.

No person or organization,
public or private, shall incur any legal liability by reason of releasing any
such information to the director of labor and industries or the section of the
department which administers this chapter or other public employees in the
performance of their official duties under this chapter.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
9. A new section is added
to chapter 7.68 RCW to read as follows:

Information contained
in the claim files and records of victims of domestic violence or stalking,
under section 1 of this act, shall not be subject to discovery in any judicial
proceeding unless the requirements of RCW 70.123.075 are satisfied.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 10. This act applies
beginning with weeks of eligibility that begin on or after January 1, 2002.

---
END ---