BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF
WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec.
1. The legislature finds
that providing the citizens of Washington with the most safe, efficient, and
effective transportation system requires that the state be able to take
advantage of contracting out of services currently provided by the department
of transportation. The legislature finds that only a truly competitive
environment can provide the greatest value for Washington's citizens, because a
competitive environment will spur innovation in these activities, resulting in
greater efficiency.

The legislature finds
that the statutory measures prohibiting such competitive activities must be
removed, and that, before seeking additional tax revenues to fund
transportation improvements, all opportunities for possible savings within
existing funding schemes must be implemented.

The legislature directs
the department of transportation to examine all the available options inherent
in this act in order to perform its work on behalf of the people of Washington
state.

Sec. 2. RCW 41.06.380 and 1979
ex.s. c 46 s 2 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) Nothing
contained in this chapter ((shall)) prohibits any department, as
defined in RCW 41.06.020, from purchasing services by contract with individuals
or business entities if such services were regularly purchased by valid
contract by such department prior to April 23, 1979((: PROVIDED, That no
such)).

(2) No contract referred
to in subsection (1) of this section may be executed or renewed if it would
have the effect of terminating classified employees or classified employee
positions existing at the time of the execution or renewal of the contract except
as provided in subsection (3) of this section.

(3) This chapter
does not prohibit the department of transportation from purchasing services,
including services that have customarily and historically been provided by
employees in the classified service under this chapter, by contracting with
individuals, nonprofit organizations, businesses, or other entities.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 3. Provisions of a
collective bargaining agreement adopted under chapter 41.06 RCW that are in
effect on the effective date of this act and that conflict with RCW 41.06.380,
as amended by section 2 of this act, will continue in effect until contract
expiration, unless a superseding agreement resolving the conflict is executed
by the parties before expiration. After expiration, any new agreement executed
between the parties must be consistent with RCW 41.06.380.

---
END ---