BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF
WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec.
1. The legislature finds
that transportation projects should be provided at the lowest cost possible to
achieve the maximum benefits to the citizens of Washington state. Projects and
services must be delivered by the most safe, efficient, and effective means
available. Prior to imposing tax increases upon Washington's citizens in order
to fund new transportation projects, the legislature owes Washington's citizens
a duty to make every current dollar stretch as far as possible in the provision
of transportation services, always keeping in mind that quality results should
not be sacrificed in pursuit of cost savings. To this end, the legislature
finds that the use of cost/benefit analysis can assist in decisions regarding
all facets of transportation project delivery.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
2. A new section is added
to chapter 47.28 RCW to read as follows:

(1) Except as provided
in subsection (2) of this section, the projects and services contracted for by
the department of transportation shall be exempt from the provisions of chapter
39.12 RCW. Nothing in this section shall be construed to affect or alter
federal requirements regarding the payment of prevailing wages under the
Davis-Bacon act or other federal statutes.

(2) The department of
transportation, in preparing the specifications for projects to be put out to
bid under this chapter, shall analyze the costs and benefits of paying the
"prevailing rate of wage," as defined in RCW 39.12.010(1), and shall
only require contractors to pay prevailing wages when the benefits of paying
such wages exceed the costs. The department may share information developed in
analyzing the costs and benefits of paying prevailing wages on transportation
projects within a given county with the county or with cities and towns located
in the county in order to assist them with their own analysis under sections 3
and 4 of this act.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
3. A new section is added
to chapter 35.21 RCW to read as follows:

(1) Except as provided
in subsection (2) of this section, the transportation projects and services
contracted for by cities, towns, and transportation benefit districts regulated
under this title shall be exempt from the provisions of chapter 39.12 RCW.
Nothing in this section shall be construed to affect or alter federal
requirements regarding the payment of prevailing wages under the Davis-Bacon
act or other federal statutes.

(2) Cities, towns, and
transportation benefit districts regulated under this title, in preparing the
specifications for transportation projects to be put out to bid, shall analyze
the costs and benefits of paying the "prevailing rate of wage," as
defined in RCW 39.12.010(1), and shall only require contractors to pay
prevailing wages when the benefits of paying such wages exceed the costs.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
4. A new section is added
to chapter 36.75 RCW to read as follows:

(1) Except as provided
in subsection (2) of this section, the transportation projects and services
contracted for by counties and transportation benefit districts regulated under
this title shall be exempt from the provisions of chapter 39.12 RCW. Nothing in
this section shall be construed to affect or alter federal requirements
regarding the payment of prevailing wages under the Davis-Bacon act or other
federal statutes.

(2) Counties and
transportation benefit districts regulated under this title, in preparing the
specifications for transportation projects to be put out to bid, shall analyze
the costs and benefits of paying the "prevailing rate of wage," as
defined in RCW 39.12.010(1), and shall only require contractors to pay
prevailing wages when the benefits of paying such wages exceed the costs.

Sec. 5. RCW 39.12.010 and 1989 c
12 s 6 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) The
"prevailing rate of wage", for the intents and purposes of this
chapter, shall be the rate of hourly wage, usual benefits, and overtime paid in
the locality, as hereinafter defined, to the majority of workers, laborers, or
mechanics, in the same trade or occupation. In the event that there is not a
majority in the same trade or occupation paid at the same rate, then the
average rate of hourly wage and overtime paid to such laborers, workers, or
mechanics in the same trade or occupation shall be the prevailing rate. If the
wage paid by any contractor or subcontractor to laborers, workers, or mechanics
on any public work is based on some period of time other than an hour, the
hourly wage for the purposes of this chapter shall be mathematically determined
by the number of hours worked in such period of time.

(2) The
"locality" for the purposes of this chapter shall be the ((largest
city in the)) county wherein the physical work is being performed.

(3) The "usual
benefits" for the purposes of this chapter shall include the amount of:

(a) The rate of
contribution irrevocably made by a contractor or subcontractor to a trustee or
to a third person pursuant to a fund, plan, or program; and

(b) The rate of costs
to the contractor or subcontractor which may be reasonably anticipated in
providing benefits to workers, laborers, and mechanics pursuant to an enforceable
commitment to carry out a financially responsible plan or program which was
communicated in writing to the workers, laborers, and mechanics affected, for
medical or hospital care, pensions on retirement or death, compensation for
injuries or illness resulting from occupational activity, or insurance to
provide any of the foregoing, for unemployment benefits, life insurance,
disability and sickness insurance, or accident insurance, for vacation and
holiday pay, for defraying costs of apprenticeship or other similar programs,
or for other bona fide fringe benefits, but only where the contractor or
subcontractor is not required by other federal, state, or local law to provide
any of such benefits.

(4) An "interested
party" for the purposes of this chapter shall include a contractor,
subcontractor, an employee of a contractor or subcontractor, an organization
whose members' wages, benefits, and conditions of employment are affected by
this chapter, and the director of labor and industries or the director's
designee.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
6. A new section is added
to chapter 39.12 RCW to read as follows:

Public
works projects and public building service maintenance contracts of the state
or any county, municipality, or political subdivision created by its laws, that
are under one hundred thousand dollars in total project costs, are exempt from
this chapter.

---
END ---