BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF
WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1. RCW 46.68.030 and 1990 c
42 s 109 are each amended to read as follows:

Except for proceeds
from fees for vehicle licensing for vehicles paying such fees under RCW
46.16.070 and 46.16.085, and as otherwise provided for in chapter 46.16 RCW,
all fees received by the director for vehicle licenses under the provisions of
chapter 46.16 RCW shall be forwarded to the state treasurer, accompanied by a
proper identifying detailed report, and be deposited to the credit of the motor
vehicle fund, except that the proceeds from the vehicle license fee and renewal
license fee shall be deposited by the state treasurer as hereinafter provided.
((After July 1, 1981, that portion)) Twenty dollars and thirty-five
cents of each original vehicle license fee ((in excess of $7.40
and that portion of each)) or renewal license fee ((in excess of
$3.40 shall)) must be deposited in the state patrol highway account
in the motor vehicle fund, hereby created. Vehicle license fees, renewal
license fees, and all other funds in the state patrol highway account shall be
for the sole use of the Washington state patrol for highway activities of the
Washington state patrol, subject to proper appropriations and reappropriations
therefor((, for any fiscal biennium after June 30, 1981, and twenty-seven
and three-tenths percent of the proceeds from $7.40 of each vehicle license fee
and $3.40)). Two dollars and two cents of each original vehicle license
fee and ninety-three cents of each renewal license fee shall be deposited
each biennium in the Puget Sound ferry operations account. Any remaining
amounts of vehicle license fees and renewal license fees that are not ((deposited
in the Puget Sound ferry operations account shall)) distributed
otherwise under this section must be deposited in the motor vehicle fund.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 2. This act is necessary for
the immediate preservation of the public peace, health, or safety, or support
of the state government and its existing public institutions, and takes effect
July 1, 2001.

---
END ---