BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF
WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1. RCW 46.16.0621 and 2000
1st sp.s. c 1 s 1 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) License tab fees
shall be thirty dollars per year for ((motor)) all vehicles,
regardless of year, value, make, or model, beginning January 1, 2000.

(2) For the purposes of
this section, "license tab fees" are defined as the general fees paid
annually for licensing ((motor)) vehicles((, including cars, sport
utility vehicles, motorcycles, and motor homes)).

Sec. 2. RCW 46.68.030 and 1990 c
42 s 109 are each amended to read as follows:

Except for proceeds
from fees for vehicle licensing for vehicles paying such fees under RCW
46.16.070 and 46.16.085, and as otherwise provided for in chapter 46.16 RCW,
all fees received by the director for vehicle licenses under the provisions of
chapter 46.16 RCW shall be forwarded to the state treasurer, accompanied by a
proper identifying detailed report, and be deposited to the credit of the motor
vehicle fund, except that the proceeds from the vehicle license fee and renewal
license fee shall be deposited by the state treasurer as hereinafter provided.
((After July 1, 1981, that portion)) Twenty dollars and thirty-five
cents of each original vehicle license fee ((in excess of $7.40
and that portion of each)) or renewal license fee ((in excess of
$3.40 shall)) must be deposited in the state patrol highway account
in the motor vehicle fund, hereby created. Vehicle license fees, renewal
license fees, and all other funds in the state patrol highway account shall be
for the sole use of the Washington state patrol for highway activities of the
Washington state patrol, subject to proper appropriations and reappropriations
therefor((, for any fiscal biennium after June 30, 1981, and twenty-seven
and three-tenths percent of the proceeds from $7.40 of each vehicle license fee
and $3.40)). Two dollars and two cents of each original vehicle license
fee and ninety-three cents of each renewal license fee shall be deposited
each biennium in the Puget Sound ferry operations account. Any remaining
amounts of vehicle license fees and renewal license fees that are not ((deposited
in the Puget Sound ferry operations account shall)) distributed
otherwise under this section must be deposited in the motor vehicle fund.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
3. (1) Section 2 of this act
is necessary for the immediate preservation of the public peace, health, or
safety, or support of the state government and its existing public
institutions, and takes effect July 1, 2001.

(2)
Section 1 of this act takes effect beginning with registration expirations that
are due or will become due September 1, 2001, and thereafter.

---
END ---