BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF
WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec.
1. The legislature finds
that over eight million people in the United States have been diagnosed with
cancer at some point in their lives; that approximately one hundred seven
billion dollars are spent on medical care to treat this disease; that a
comprehensive approach to cancer is needed that will be more responsive to the
issue than a piecemeal approach; and that a comprehensive approach to cancer
will enable Washington state to choose where to focus health promotion
resources, set statewide priorities, and build a coordinated team of educators,
institutions, and organizations.

The legislature further
finds that the formation and development of an advisory committee on
comprehensive cancer coordination and control is an important part of the
legislature's goal to positively impact the overall health and well-being of
its citizens.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
2. A new section is added
to chapter 43.70 RCW to read as follows:

(1) For the purposes of
this section, "a comprehensive approach to cancer" means an
integrated and coordinated approach to reduce the incidence, morbidity,
mortality, and family anguish of cancer through prevention, early detection,
and timely treatment.

(2) The advisory
committee on cancer coordination and control is established in the department.
The committee may have no more than twenty members, including the secretary or
the secretary's designee who shall serve as chair. The committee must meet at
least quarterly in its first year and at least annually thereafter. Four of
the members of the committee must be legislators, one appointed by each caucus
of the house of representatives and senate. The remainder of the members shall
be included but not limited to the following: Cancer survivors, public and
private health plans, advocacy organizations, research groups, hospitals, local
public health officials, physicians, nurses, and employers.

(3) Except for the
secretary, members of the committee serve four-year terms. Of the initial members,
five must be appointed for a one-year term, five must be appointed for a
two-year term, five must be appointed for a three-year term, and five must be
appointed for a four-year term. Members may succeed themselves for one term
and may be appointed again after being off the committee for one term.

(4) The committee must
recommend to the secretary a plan for the statewide implementation of an
interagency comprehensive coordinated cancer control program that includes but
is not limited to:

(a) Identifying and
examining the limitations and problems associated with existing laws, rules,
programs, and services related to cancer control;

(b) Examining the
awareness of, access to, and financing of cancer control services for
Washington's citizens, with attention paid to the

uninsured and underinsured,
and regional, urban, and rural differences;

(c) Advising the
secretary on a coordinated, effective, and efficient use of resources;

(d) Identifying and
reviewing health promotion and disease prevention strategies relating to the
leading causes of cancer mortality and morbidity; and

(e) Supporting and
encouraging state research efforts to find a cure for cancer.

(5) The department must
submit a written report not later than twelve months after the effective date
of this section to the governor and the legislature. The report must address a
written plan, including policy recommendations, for statewide implementation of
a coordinated cancer control program.

(6) Annual reports must
then be submitted thereafter to highlight plan implementation.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
3. If any provision of this
act or its application to any person or circumstance is held invalid, the
remainder of the act or the application of the provision to other persons or
circumstances is not affected.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 4. This act is necessary for
the immediate preservation of the public peace, health, or safety, or support
of the state government and its existing public institutions, and takes effect
immediately.

---
END ---