BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF
WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1. RCW 49.17.140 and 1994 c
61 s 1 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) If after an
inspection or investigation the director or the director's authorized
representative issues a citation under the authority of RCW 49.17.120 or
49.17.130, the department, within a reasonable time after the termination of
such inspection or investigation, shall notify the employer by certified mail
of the penalty to be assessed under the authority of RCW 49.17.180 and shall
state that the employer has ((fifteen)) ninety working days
within which to notify the director that the employer wishes to appeal the
citation or assessment of penalty. If, within ((fifteen)) ninety
working days from the communication of the notice issued by the director the
employer fails to notify the director that the employer intends to appeal the
citation or assessment penalty, and no notice is filed by any employee or
representative of employees under subsection (3) of this section within such
time, the citation and the assessment shall be deemed a final order of the
department and not subject to review by any court or agency.

(2) If the director has
reason to believe that an employer has failed to correct a violation for which
a citation has been issued within the period permitted in the citation for its
correction, which period shall not begin to run until the entry of a final
order in the case of any appeal proceedings under this section initiated by the
employer in good faith and not solely for delay or avoidance of penalties, the
director shall notify the employer by certified mail of such failure to correct
the violation and of the penalty to be assessed under RCW 49.17.180 by reason
of such failure, and shall state that the employer has fifteen working days
from the communication of such notification and assessment of penalty to notify
the director that the employer wishes to appeal the director's notification of
the assessment of penalty. If, within fifteen working days from the receipt of
notification issued by the director the employer fails to notify the director
that the employer intends to appeal the notification of assessment of penalty,
the notification and assessment of penalty shall be deemed a final order of the
department and not subject to review by any court or agency.

(3) If any employer
notifies the director that the employer intends to appeal the citation issued
under either RCW 49.17.120 or 49.17.130 or notification of the assessment of a
penalty issued under subsections (1) or (2) of this section, or if, within
fifteen working days from the issuance of a citation under either RCW 49.17.120
or 49.17.130 any employee or representative of employees files a notice with
the director alleging that the period of time fixed in the citation for the
abatement of the violation is unreasonable, the director may reassume
jurisdiction over the entire matter, or any portion thereof upon which notice
of intention to appeal has been filed with the director pursuant to this
subsection. If the director reassumes jurisdiction of all or any portion of
the matter upon which notice of appeal has been filed with the director, any
redetermination shall be completed and corrective notices of assessment of
penalty, citations, or revised periods of abatement completed within a period
of thirty working days. The thirty-working-day redetermination period may be
extended up to fifteen additional working days upon agreement of all parties to
the appeal. The redetermination shall then become final subject to direct
appeal to the board of industrial insurance appeals within fifteen working days
of such redetermination with service of notice of appeal upon the director. In
the event that the director does not reassume jurisdiction as provided in this
subsection, the director shall promptly notify the state board of industrial
insurance appeals of all notifications of intention to appeal any such
citations, any such notices of assessment of penalty and any employee or
representative of employees notice of intention to appeal the period of time
fixed for abatement of a violation and in addition certify a full copy of the
record in such appeal matters to the board. The director shall adopt rules of
procedure for the reassumption of jurisdiction under this subsection affording
employers, employees, and employee representatives notice of the reassumption
of jurisdiction by the director, and an opportunity to object or support the
reassumption of jurisdiction, either in writing or orally at an informal
conference to be held prior to the expiration of the redetermination period. A
notice of appeal filed under this section shall stay the effectiveness of any
citation or notice of the assessment of a penalty pending review by the board
of industrial insurance appeals, but such appeal shall not stay the
effectiveness of any order of immediate restraint issued by the director under
the authority of RCW 49.17.130. The board of industrial insurance appeals
shall afford an opportunity for a hearing in the case of each such appellant
and the department shall be represented in such hearing by the attorney general
and the board shall in addition provide affected employees or authorized
representatives of affected employees an opportunity to participate as parties
to hearings under this subsection. The board shall thereafter make disposition
of the issues in accordance with procedures relative to contested cases
appealed to the state board of industrial insurance appeals.

Upon
application by an employer showing that a good faith effort to comply with the
abatement requirements of a citation has been made and that the abatement has
not been completed because of factors beyond the employer's control, the
director after affording an opportunity for a hearing shall issue an order
affirming or modifying the abatement requirements in such citation.

--- END ---