BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF
WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec.
1. Providing quality public
services for all citizens of the state requires well-qualified and experienced
state employees. However, salaries for state employees have not kept up with
the increased cost-of-living in the state. The failure to keep up with inflation
threatens Washington's ability to compete with other sectors to attract
first-rate employees to Washington state public service and to retain
well-qualified employees from leaving for other employment opportunities. The
state must provide a fair and reasonable cost-of-living increase to ensure that
the state attracts and retains the best employees for the citizens of
Washington ensuring public safety, government efficiency, and program quality.

It is the intent of the
legislature that state employees described in section 2 of this act receive an
annual salary cost-of-living increase identical to the cost-of-living increase
for school district and community college employees pursuant to Initiative
Measure No. 732.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
2. A new section is added
to chapter 41.04 RCW to read as follows:

(1) State employees
shall be provided an annual salary cost-of-living increase in accordance with
this section.

(2)(a) Beginning July
1, 2001, and on each July 1st thereafter, state employees shall receive a
salary cost-of-living increase. The increase amount shall be determined by the
office of financial management on June 15th of each year by using the
cost-of-living index under subsection (3) of this section.

(b) For purposes of
this section, "state employees" means all classified employees,
employees of institutions of higher education under the jurisdiction of chapter
41.56 RCW pursuant to the provisions of RCW 28B.16.015, and including those
employees in the Washington management service, and exempt employees under the
jurisdiction of the personnel resources board; general government, legislative,
and judicial employees exempt from merit system rules whose maximum salaries
are not set by the commission on salaries for elected officials; and ferry
workers.

(c) For purposes of
this section, "state employees" does not include: State officers and
officials whose salaries are set by the commission for salaries for elected
officials; state employees who receive an annual salary cost-of-living increase
pursuant to Initiative Measure No. 732; certificated employees of the state
schools for the deaf and blind; and instructional and research faculty,
academic administrators, academic librarians, counselors, and teaching and research
assistants at state universities, regional universities, and state colleges
described in RCW 28B.10.016, whose salaries are determined by the governing
boards of such institutions.

(3) For the purposes of
this section, "cost-of-living index" means, for any fiscal year, the
previous calendar year's annual average consumer price index, using the
official current base, compiled by the bureau of labor statistics, United
States department of labor for the state of Washington. If the bureau of labor
statistics develops more than one consumer price index for areas within the
state, the index covering the greatest number of people, covering areas
exclusively within the boundaries of the state, and including all items shall
be used for the cost-of-living index in this section.

(4) The office of
financial management shall calculate and include an appropriation to fund this
annual salary cost-of-living increase in the biennium budget proposal to the
legislature under chapter 43.88 RCW. Any funded cost-of-living increase shall
be included in the salary base used to determine cost-of-living increases for
all state employees in subsequent years.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 3. This act is necessary for
the immediate preservation of the public peace, health, or safety, or support
of the state government and its existing public institutions, and takes effect
immediately.

---
END ---