BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF
WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec.
1. The legislature declares
an emergency caused by a natural disaster, known as the Nisqually earthquake,
which occurred on February 28, 2001, as proclaimed by the governor and the
president of the United States.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
2. A new section is added
to chapter 38.52 RCW to read as follows:

The Nisqually
earthquake account is created in the state treasury. Moneys may be placed in
the account from tax revenues, budget transfers or appropriations, federal
appropriations, gifts, or any other lawful source. Moneys in the account may
be spent only after appropriation. Moneys in the account shall be used only to
support state and local government disaster response and recovery efforts
associated with the Nisqually earthquake.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
3. The sum of one million
dollars is appropriated from the emergency reserve fund to the state military
department for deposit into the Nisqually earthquake account.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
4. One million dollars of
the Nisqually earthquake account‑-state, representing the state share,
and three million dollars of the Nisqually earthquake account‑-federal,
representing the federal share, are appropriated to the state military
department for response and recovery costs associated with the Nisqually
earthquake.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
5. (1) The legislature
declares an emergency for energy for low-income households.

(2) The sum of one
million dollars, or as much thereof as may be necessary, is appropriated from
the emergency reserve fund to the department of community, trade, and economic
development for the fiscal year ending June 30, 2001, for energy assistance
under the low-income home energy assistance program.

(3) The sum of four
million dollars, or as much thereof as may be necessary, is appropriated from
the general fund‑-federal to the department of community, trade, and
economic development for the fiscal year ending June 30, 2001, for energy
assistance under the low-income home energy assistance program.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 6. This act is necessary for
the immediate preservation of the public peace, health, or safety, or support
of the state government and its existing public institutions, and takes effect
immediately.

---
END ---