BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF
WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec.
1. The legislature finds
that the department of social and health services established a final siting
criteria in November 2000 for less restrictive alternatives for sexually
violent predators to ensure community input, safety, and confidence prior to
determining where a facility should be located. Under this criteria, the
department is required to establish new siting and safety criteria, and provide
the public opportunity for review and comment, prior to determining a location
for a less restrictive alternative facility which houses thirty or more
sexually violent predators. The legislature further finds that such criteria
is essential in giving the local governments and citizens of a community the
opportunity to express concerns and inform the state of problems or injustices
that may have been overlooked. The legislature further finds that the
department of social and health services should follow their own criteria or
criteria established by the legislature.

Furthermore, the
legislature finds that regardless of where a less restrictive alternative
treatment facility for sexually violent predators is finally established, there
will be a negative impact on the surrounding communities, particularly in those
communities that already have a disproportionate share of correctional
facilities and state mental health hospitals. Finally, the legislature
recognizes that the state should mitigate this negative impact by providing
financial assistance to such counties and cities for the increased costs
associated with protecting the citizens who live near these facilities.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
2. A new section is added
to chapter 71.09 RCW to read as follows:

Notwithstanding any
other provision of law, before siting and operating a less restrictive
alternative treatment facility housing thirty or more sexually violent
predators on court-ordered conditional release, the department shall, as
provided in the final siting criteria statement issued by the department in
November 2000, develop siting and safety criteria for the facility with the
assistance of the secure placement advisory committee and provide the public
opportunity for review and comment.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
3. A new section is added
to chapter 71.09 RCW to read as follows:

The state may not site
and operate an additional less restrictive alternative facility for sexually
violent predators on court-ordered conditional release from the special
commitment center as provided in RCW 71.09.090 in a county where the special
commitment center and the less restrictive alternative treatment facility
established pursuant to section 2, chapter . . ., Laws of 2001 (House
Bill No. 2223) are located.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
4. A new section is added
to chapter 71.09 RCW to read as follows:

Other than an order
directing conditional release to the less restrictive alternative treatment
facility established pursuant to section 2, chapter . . ., Laws of
2001 (House Bill No. 2223), the court may not enter an order directing
conditional release to a less restrictive alternative located in a county where
the special commitment center and the less restrictive alternative treatment
facility established pursuant to section 2, chapter . . ., Laws of
2001 (House Bill No. 2223) are located.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
5. A new section is added
to chapter 71.09 RCW to read as follows:

(1) A sexually violent
predator who is a resident of a less restrictive alternative treatment facility
established pursuant to section 2, chapter . . ., Laws of 2001 (House
Bill No. 2223) may not be released from the facility or allowed to leave the
facility, even if escorted, until the state has entered into a mitigation
agreement as required under subsection (2) of this section.

(2) The state shall
enter into a mitigation agreement with the county in which the less restrictive
alternative treatment facility established pursuant to section 2, chapter
. . ., Laws of 2001 (House Bill No. 2223) is located and with each
city located within a ten-mile radius of the facility that will ensure state
funding in an amount adequate to fully mitigate anticipated or realized
increased costs in law enforcement resulting from the increased risks to public
safety brought about by the presence of sexually violent predators in those
communities due to the siting of the facility.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
6. A new section is added
to chapter 71.09 RCW to read as follows:

A sexually violent
predator on court-ordered conditional release residing in the less restrictive
alternative treatment facility for sexually violent predators established
pursuant to section 2, chapter . . ., Laws of 2001 (House Bill No.
2223) is not eligible to receive any financial assistance from the state for
postsecondary education.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
7. If any provision of this
act or its application to any person or circumstance is held invalid, the
remainder of the act or the application of the provision to other persons or
circumstances is not affected.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 8. This act is necessary for
the immediate preservation of the public peace, health, or safety, or support
of the state government and its existing public institutions, and takes effect
immediately.

---
END ---