BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF
WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec.
1. The department of
veterans affairs indicates that it may acquire and staff an existing
one-hundred-bed skilled nursing facility in Spokane and reopen it as an eastern
Washington veterans' home by using a combination of funding sources. Funding
sources include federal per diem payments, contributions from residents'
incomes, and federal and state medicaid payments. In authorizing the
establishment of an eastern Washington veterans' home, it is the intent of the
legislature that the state general fund shall not provide support in future
biennia for the eastern Washington veterans' home except for amounts required
to pay the state share of medicaid costs.

Sec. 2. RCW 72.36.035 and 1993
sp.s. c 3 s 6 are each amended to read as follows:

For purposes of this
chapter, unless the context clearly indicates otherwise:

(1) "Actual bona
fide residents of this state" means persons who have a domicile in the
state of Washington immediately prior to application for admission to a state veterans'
home.

(2)
"Department" means the Washington state department of veterans
affairs.

(3)
"Domicile" means a person's true, fixed, and permanent home and place
of habitation, and shall be the place where the person intends to remain, and
to which the person expects to return when the person leaves without intending
to establish a new domicile elsewhere.

(4) "State
veterans' homes" means ((either)) the Washington soldiers'
home and colony in Orting, ((or)) the Washington veterans' home in
Retsil, ((or both)) and the eastern Washington veterans' home.

(5)
"Veteran" has the same meaning established in RCW 41.04.005.

Sec. 3. RCW 72.36.045 and 1977
ex.s. c 186 s 10 are each amended to read as follows:

In the
maintenance of the ((Washington soldiers' home and colony and the Washington))
state veterans' homes by the state through the department of
veterans' affairs, such maintenance shall include, but not be limited to, the
provision of members' room and board, medical and dental care, physical and
occupational therapy, and recreational activities, with the necessary
implementing transportation, equipment, and personnel therefor.

Sec. 4. RCW 72.36.055 and 1977
ex.s. c 186 s 6 are each amended to read as follows:

The ((soldiers'
home and colony at Orting and the Washington)) state veterans' homes
((at Retsil)) shall provide both domiciliary and nursing care. The
level of domiciliary members shall remain consistent with the facilities
available to accommodate those members: PROVIDED, That nothing in this section
shall preclude the department from moving residents between nursing and
domiciliary care in order to better utilize facilities and maintain the
appropriate care for the members.

Sec. 5. RCW 72.36.060 and 1977
ex.s. c 186 s 3 are each amended to read as follows:

The state treasurer is
authorized to receive any and all moneys appropriated or paid by the United
States under the act of congress entitled "An Act to provide aid to state
or territorial homes for disabled soldiers and sailors of the United
States," approved August 27, 1888, or under any other act or acts of
congress for the benefit of such homes. Such moneys shall be deposited in the
general fund and shall be expended for the maintenance of the ((soldiers'
home and)) state veterans' homes.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
6. A new section is added
to chapter 72.36 RCW to read as follows:

There
shall be established and maintained in this state a branch of the state
soldiers' home, under the name of the "eastern Washington veterans'
home," which branch shall be a home for veterans and their spouses who
meet admission requirements contained in RCW 72.36.030.

Sec. 7. RCW 43.60A.075 and 1977
c 31 s 5 are each amended to read as follows:

The director of the
department of veterans affairs shall have full power to manage and govern the
state soldiers' home and colony ((and)), the Washington veterans'
home, and the eastern Washington veterans' home.

Sec. 8. RCW 72.36.090 and 1977
ex.s. c 186 s 9 are each amended to read as follows:

The superintendents of
the state ((soldiers' home and colony and the state)) veterans' homes
are hereby authorized to:

(1) Institute programs
of hobby promotion designed to improve the general welfare and mental condition
of the persons under their supervision;

(2) Provide for the
financing of these programs by grants from funds in the superintendent's
custody through operation of canteens and exchanges at such institutions;

(3) Limit
the hobbies sponsored to projects which will, in their judgment, be
self-liquidating or self-sustaining.

---
END ---