BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF
WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec.
1. (1) A defendant charged
with a misdemeanor or gross misdemeanor in superior court or a court of limited
jurisdiction who pleads not guilty and does not waive his or her right to a
speedy trial and:

(a) Who is not released
from jail pending trial shall be brought to trial not later than sixty days
after the date of arraignment; or

(b) Who is released
from jail whether or not subjected to conditions of release pending trial shall
be brought to trial not later than ninety days after the date of arraignment.

(2) A defendant charged
with a felony in superior court who pleads not guilty and does not waive his or
her right to a speedy trial and:

(a) Who is not released
from jail pending trial shall be brought to trial not later than one hundred
twenty days after the date of arraignment; or

(b) Who is released
from jail whether or not subjected to conditions of release pending trial shall
be brought to trial not later than one hundred eighty days after the date of
arraignment.

(3) To the extent that
court rules CrR 3.3, CrRLJ 3.3, and JuCR 7.8 on the right to a speedy trial are
inconsistent with this section, those rules are superseded by this section.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 2. Section 1 of this act
constitutes a new chapter in Title 10 RCW.

---
END ---