BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF
WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec.
1. LEGISLATIVE INTENT AND
FINDINGS.
The legislature finds that the public health and safety of its citizens,
natural resources, and the environment are vital interests of the state that
need to be protected and preserved. The legislature further finds that the
safety of the traveling public and the state's economic well-being are vital
interests that depend upon the development of cost-effective transportation
systems that are planned, designed, constructed, and maintained in an efficient
manner.

It is the intent of the
legislature to demonstrate that state environmental objectives can be achieved
while improving the decision making and delivery processes of transportation
projects. This can be achieved by improving the working relationship between
those charged with transportation project delivery and those working in
resource agencies charged with environmental protection. It is further the intent
of the legislature to both achieve transportation permit reform to expedite the
delivery of transportation projects of statewide significance and to strive to
increase environmental benefits through a watershed-based approach to aquatic
and natural resource management. In order to optimize the limited resources
available for transportation system improvements and environmental protection,
state regulatory and natural resource agencies, public and private sector
interests, Indian tribes, and the department of transportation must work
cooperatively and with greater trust to establish common goals, minimize
project delays, develop agreed upon standards, and maximize environmental
benefits through coordinated investment strategies, increased certainty and consistency
of actions through the development of agreed upon environmental standards, and
the elimination of duplicative processes.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
2. DEFINITIONS. The
definitions in this section apply throughout this chapter unless the context
clearly requires otherwise.

(1) "Best
available information" means the existing sources of data, including
limiting factors analyses required under chapter 77.85 RCW that can be used to
make informed decisions regarding environmental conditions within a watershed.

(2) "Best
management practices" means currently available and generally accepted
techniques, including new technologies or strategies that seek to reduce the
negative impacts of transportation facilities, projects, and services on
communities and the environment, and promote more efficient and effective use
of transportation facilities. Examples include transportation demand
management, transportation systems management, and compensatory mitigation.

(3)
"Department" means the state department of transportation.

(4) "Least cost
environmental planning" means the efficient gathering and use of best
available information within a watershed basin applied to transportation
decision making in the planning, permitting, and mitigation phases of a
project.

(5) "Low-impact
development standards" means techniques, technologies, or strategies that
seek to reduce the negative impact of transportation facilities, projects, and
services on communities and the environment, and promote more efficient and
effective use of transportation facilities. Examples include transportation
demand management, transportation system management, and smart growth.

(6) "One-stop
permitting" means a coordinated permitting process that streamlines
environmental review and decision making for transportation projects by
providing concurrent, consolidated review by each agency required to review and
approve the project.

(7) "Programmatic
agreement" or "general permit" means a regulatory instrument
that outlines permit conditions and obligations for a variety of similar
project activities spanning a watershed ecosystem or geographically defined
boundary that, once entered into by parties, delineates an applicant's proposed
actions over a specific period of time, and that may be conducted without the
necessity of obtaining individually developed permits for the types of projects
identified. The instruments must comply with all relevant local, state, and
federal standards.

(8)
"Transportation permit coordination task force" or "task
force" means the task force created in section 3 of this act.

(9)
"Transportation project of statewide significance" means a project or
combination of projects that transverse multiple city or county jurisdictional
boundaries and are so designated by the legislature.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
3. TRANSPORTATION PERMIT
COORDINATION TASK FORCE‑-CREATED. The transportation permit coordination
task force is created.

(1) The task force will
consist of one representative appointed by the secretary of transportation, one
member appointed by the director of ecology, one member appointed by the
director of fish and wildlife, and one member appointed by the governor who
will also serve as the chair of the task force.

(2) The task force may
seek advice from other persons and may appoint subcommittees, on an ad hoc
basis, to assist with its work. These appointments may include, but are not
limited to, representatives from interest groups, local governments, tribes,
federal regulatory and transportation agencies, and other governmental
entities.

(3) The department
shall provide administrative and clerical assistance to the task force.
Department of ecology staff costs associated with the task force are
reimbursable under RCW 43.21A.690 and 90.03.265. Department of fish and
wildlife staff costs are reimbursable under RCW 43.300.080.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
4. TASK FORCE‑-RESPONSIBILITIES.
The task force shall:

(1) Develop concise
programmatic environmental standards and best management practices for
low-impact transportation projects that can be applied with certainty,
consistency, and assurance of swift permit action, while taking into account
the varying climate, geomorphologic, and hydrologic conditions throughout the
state and protecting environmental quality. To achieve this goal, the task
force shall:

(a) Identify categories
of low-impact projects appropriate for general permits;

(b) By March 1, 2002,
develop general permits and programmatic consultation processes for the list of
projects developed in (a) of this subsection;

(c) Evaluate the use of
planning and permitting standards that encourage low-impact alternatives and
reduce the permit process for projects that use low-impact development
standards;

(d) Develop preliminary
models and strategies to test how best to maximize the environmental investment
of transportation funds within the framework of this chapter;

(2) Develop and
prioritize a list of permit streamlining opportunities, specifically
identifying substantive and procedural duplications and suggestions for
resolving those duplications, and standard development needs such as developing
agreement on state transportation storm water standards;

(3) Assess models to
collate and access watershed data to support early agency involvement and
improve environmental protection in transportation planning and National
Environmental Policy Act and State Environmental Policy Act reviews. At a
minimum, this model should use existing best available information from
watershed planning efforts, lead entities, and regional fisheries enhancement
groups to determine potential mitigation site requirements for project actions
within a watershed. Priority consideration should be given to the use of the
state's alternative mitigation strategy to best link transportation mitigation
needs with local watershed and lead entity project lists;

(4) Develop least cost
methodology for analyzing environmental impacts and applying compensatory
mitigation consistent with a watershed-based approach before final design;

(5) Review the
department's construction project list to determine which projects can be
included in programmatic or general permit agreements. The task force will
develop a template for an agreement to cover those projects;

(6) Provide reports to
the transportation and environment committees of the senate and house of
representatives by December 1, 2001, and for the next two years.

The task force is
dissolved and this section expires June 30, 2004.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
5. REGULATION LIMITS. The
departments of transportation, ecology, and fish and wildlife shall implement
standards of the task force through rules or policy guidance as appropriate,
under existing regulatory authorities. The purpose of this section is not to
increase regulatory requirements or to expand the jurisdiction of the
departments.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
6. A new section is added
to chapter 43.21A RCW to read as follows:

ONE-STOP PERMITS
PROCESS. (1) By January 1, 2002, the permit assistance center at the
department of ecology, working with the task force established in section 3 of
this act, shall develop and coordinate a one-stop permitting process for
transportation projects. The process must use interdisciplinary review of
transportation projects to streamline and expedite decision making concerning
required permits. The process must allow sufficient flexibility to be
consistent with the consolidated project permit process required of local
governments under RCW 36.70B.060. The permit assistance center shall consult
with local governments in developing the process that will address subsections
(2), (3), and (4) of this section. Federal permits identified in this section
must be incorporated into the one-stop process to the maximum extent possible.

(2) The one-stop
process must include guidelines that address permit timelines, coordination of
environmental analyses under chapter 43.21C RCW (SEPA), coordination of local
government reviews and permits with state and federal requirements, and other
measures significant for expediting and coordinating review of transportation
projects of statewide significance. The process must maximize the flexibility
under current statutes to expedite reviews, eliminate duplicative processes,
integrate concurrent permit reviews, and must address:

(a) Developing a
uniform methodology for plan submittal that details project elements that
impact environmental resources and proposed mitigation measures for use during
the preliminary specifications and engineering phase of project development;

(b) Coordinating public
notice and comment procedures with the objective of providing a single notice
and a consolidated public hearing on all applicable state permits and
right-of-way agreements;

(c) Specified time
frames, including time limits for screening the application for completeness
and for other critical milestones;

(d) Providing for
concurrent rather than sequential review of permits and agreements; and

(e) Funding or other
assistance to the permitting agencies to avoid increasing permitting delays for
other applicants.

(3) At a minimum, the
one-stop permitting process for transportation projects must address permits or
leases issued under the following: Permit or certifications under the Federal
Clean Water Act, sections 401, 402, and 404; section 10 of the Rivers and
Harbors Act; substantial development permits under chapter 90.58 RCW; water
quality permits under chapter 90.48 RCW; hydraulic project approvals under
chapter 77.55 RCW; applicable permits issued under the Growth Management Act,
chapter 36.70A RCW; and aquatic leases issued under chapter 79.94 RCW.

(4) The permit
assistance center shall develop a dispute resolution process to resolve
conflicts in interpretation of environmental standards and best management
practices, mitigation requirements, permit requirements, and other related
issues. Every effort to include federal agencies in the dispute resolution
process must be made. A list of ongoing disputed issues must be included in
the task force's report to the legislature.

(5) If a project is
designated by the legislature as a transportation project of statewide
significance, all local governments and state agencies with regulatory or
leasing authority must participate in the one-stop permitting process for that
project. Local governments participating in the one-stop permitting process
are eligible for cost reimbursement.

(6) The department of
transportation or other sponsor of a major transportation project shall be
given a high priority when the sponsor seeks to enter a cost-reimbursement
agreement to accomplish permit or lease coordination and expedited review by
the following state agencies:

(a) The department of
ecology, under the cost-reimbursement authority of RCW 43.21A.690 and
90.03.265;

(b) The department of
natural resources, under the cost-reimbursement authority of RCW 43.30.420; and

(c) The department of
fish and wildlife, under the cost-reimbursement authority of RCW 43.300.080.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
7. PILOT PROJECTS. The
legislature finds that comprehensive environmental permitting between agencies,
tribes, and other interested parties that focuses on concise design standards
and a commitment to expedited permit decisions will minimize duplicative and
time-consuming permit processes while achieving enhanced environmental
benefit. To this end, the permit assistance center at the department of
ecology shall coordinate teams to conduct three permit reform pilot projects.
The pilot projects must:

(1) Include a mix of
projects and areas to encompass:

(a) A significant
project in a congested urbanized area that is nearly fully built upon;

(b) Projects that can
be grouped for geographic permitting related to a watershed or watersheds and
salmon recovery area in an area located west of the Cascade range;

(c) Projects that can
be grouped for geographic permitting related to eastern Washington watersheds
and salmon recovery area in an area located east of the Cascade range;

(2) Implement and
monitor the one-stop permit process to:

(a) Link expedited
permit decision making to best available information in a basin;

(b) Link the investment
strategy and priorities of the department with the mitigation needs of the
watersheds in the pilot areas;

(3) Give consideration
to flexible approaches that maximize the benefits of transportation and
environmental investments;

(4) Provide a
preliminary report to the legislature by December 1, 2001, a second report by
December 1, 2002, and a final report by December 1, 2003, on the policies
developed and actions taken under this section and section 6 of this act.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
8. DELEGATION OF FEDERAL
PERMITTING AUTHORITY. (1) The governor shall seek federal delegation to the
state of the following authority: Section 404 permit authority under the
federal Clean Water Act; nonfederal lead agency status under the Federal
Endangered Species Act, 16 U.S.C. Sec. 1535; and other appropriate authority.

(2) The governor shall
provide a report to the transportation and environment committees of the senate
and house of representatives by December 1, 2001, regarding the requirements
and implications of the state receipt of delegated authority to administer the
wetlands discharge permit program under section 404 of the federal Clean Water
Act, 33 U.S.C. Sec. 1344. The report must address:

(a) What authorities
for a state-administered wetlands regulatory permit program are required for
approval of the delegation, and legislation needed to implement the authority;

(b) The fiscal and
staff resources necessary to administer such a program, including permit fees
or other funding sources;

(c) Implications of
seeking delegation for certain categories of projects; and

(d) Alternatives to
full delegation that may accomplish the primary objective of coordinating
expediting concurrent state and federal regulatory approvals of transportation
projects affecting waters of the state.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
9. Sections 1 through 5 of
this act constitute a new chapter in Title 47 RCW.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
10. The department of
transportation shall use funds appropriated in the 2001-2003 biennial
transportation budget to implement this act to fund or provide other assistance
for permitting agencies, both state and local, for activities to carry out the
purposes of this act.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
11. Section captions used in
this act are not any part of the law.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 12. This act is necessary for
the immediate preservation of the public peace, health, or safety, or support
of the state government and its existing public institutions, and takes effect
immediately.

---
END ---