BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF
WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1. RCW 51.08.178 and 1988 c
161 s 12 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) For the purposes of
this title, the monthly wages the worker was receiving from all employment at
the time of injury shall be the basis upon which compensation is computed
unless otherwise provided specifically in the statute concerned. In cases
where the worker's wages are not fixed by the month, they shall be determined
by multiplying the daily wage the worker was receiving at the time of the injury:

(a) By five, if the
worker was normally employed one day a week;

(b) By nine, if the
worker was normally employed two days a week;

(c) By thirteen, if the
worker was normally employed three days a week;

(d) By eighteen, if the
worker was normally employed four days a week;

(e) By twenty-two, if
the worker was normally employed five days a week;

(f) By twenty-six, if
the worker was normally employed six days a week;

(g) By thirty, if the
worker was normally employed seven days a week.

(2) The term "wages"
shall include the reasonable value of board, housing, and fuel((, or
other consideration of like nature)) received from the employer as part of
the contract of hire, but shall not include overtime pay except in cases under
subsection (((2))) (4) of this section. However, tips shall also
be considered wages only to the extent such tips are reported to the employer
for federal income tax purposes. The daily wage shall be the hourly wage
multiplied by the number of hours the worker is normally employed. The number
of hours the worker is normally employed shall be determined by the department
in a fair and reasonable manner, which may include averaging the number of
hours worked per day.

(((2))) (3)
For the sole purpose of calculating wage replacement benefits and death
benefits under RCW 51.32.050, 51.32.060, and 51.32.090, the cost actually paid
by the employer for any medical and dental insurance provided to the worker at
the time of injury shall be added to the worker's total monthly wages under this
section. This subsection shall not apply during any period in which the
employer continues the same level of medical and dental benefits that were
provided at the time of injury.

(4) In cases
where (a) the worker's employment is exclusively seasonal in nature or (b) the
worker's current employment or his or her relation to his or her employment is
essentially part-time or intermittent, the monthly wage shall be determined by
dividing by twelve the total wages earned, including overtime, from all employment
in any twelve successive calendar months preceding the injury which fairly
represent the claimant's employment pattern.

(((3))) (5)
If, within the twelve months immediately preceding the injury, the worker has
received from the employer at the time of injury a bonus as part of the
contract of hire, the average monthly value of such bonus shall be included in
determining the worker's monthly wages.

(((4))) (6)
In cases where a wage has not been fixed or cannot be reasonably and fairly
determined, the monthly wage shall be computed on the basis of the usual wage
paid other employees engaged in like or similar occupations where the wages are
fixed.

(7) The
department shall adopt such rules as may be necessary to implement this
section.

--- END ---