BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF
WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1. RCW 74.04.630 and 1986 c
158 s 22 are each amended to read as follows:

The
department ((shall)) may enter into contractual agreements with
the United States department of health, education and welfare, consistent with
the provisions of Public Laws 92-603 and 93-66, and to be effective January 1,
1974, for the purpose of enabling the secretary of the department of health,
education and welfare to perform administrative functions of state
supplementation to the national supplemental security income program and the
determination of medicaid eligibility on behalf of the state. The department is
authorized to transfer and make payments of state funds to the secretary of the
department of health, education and welfare as required by Public Laws 92-603
and 93-66((: PROVIDED, HOWEVER, That such)). These agreements
shall be submitted for review and comment to the social and health services
committees of the senate and house of representatives. The department of
social and health services shall administer the state supplemental program as
established in RCW 74.04.620.

--- END ---