BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF
WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec.
1. The following acts or
parts of acts are each repealed:

(1) RCW 35.58.273 (Public transportation
systems--Motor vehicle excise tax authorized--Credits--Public hearing on route
and design--Rules--Sales and use tax on rental cars) and 1998 c 321 s 25, 1992
c 194 s 11, 1991 c 339 s 29, 1991 c 309 s 1, 1990 c 42 s 316, 1987 c 428 s 2,
1979 ex.s. c 175 s 2, & 1969 ex.s. c 255 s 8;

(2) RCW 35.58.274 (Public transportation
systems--Motor vehicles exempt from tax) and 1985 c 7 s 100 & 1969 ex.s. c
255 s 9;

(3) RCW 35.58.275 (Public transportation
systems--Provisions of motor vehicle excise tax chapter applicable) and 1969
ex.s. c 255 s 10;

(4) RCW 35.58.276 (Public transportation
systems--When tax due and payable--Collection) and 1971 ex.s. c 199 s 1 &
1969 ex.s. c 255 s 11;

(5) RCW 35.58.277 (Public transportation
systems--Remittance of tax by county auditor) and 1979 c 158 s 91 & 1969
ex.s. c 255 s 12; and

(6) RCW 35.58.278 (Public transportation systems--Distribution
of tax) and 1975 1st ex.s. c 270 s 2, 1974 ex.s. c 54 s 1, & 1969 ex.s. c
255 s 13.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
2. This act is necessary for
the immediate preservation of the public peace, health, or safety, or support
of the state government and its existing public institutions, and takes effect
immediately.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 3. This act applies
retroactively to January 1, 2000.

---
END ---