BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF
WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1. RCW 82.36.010 and 1998 c
176 s 6 are each amended to read as follows:

The definitions in this
section apply throughout this chapter unless the context clearly requires
otherwise.

(1) "Blended
fuel" means a mixture of motor vehicle fuel and another liquid, other than
a de minimus amount of the liquid, that can be used as a fuel to propel a motor
vehicle.

(2) "Bond"
means a bond duly executed with a corporate surety qualified under chapter
48.28 RCW, which bond is payable to the state of Washington conditioned upon
faithful performance of all requirements of this chapter, including the payment
of all taxes, penalties, and other obligations arising out of this chapter.

(3) "Bulk
transfer" means a transfer of motor vehicle fuel by pipeline or vessel.

(4) "Bulk
transfer-terminal system" means the motor vehicle fuel distribution system
consisting of refineries, pipelines, vessels, and terminals. Motor vehicle
fuel in a refinery, pipeline, vessel, or terminal is in the bulk
transfer-terminal system. Motor vehicle fuel in the fuel tank of an engine,
motor vehicle, or in a railcar, trailer, truck, or other equipment suitable for
ground transportation is not in the bulk transfer-terminal system.

(5) "Dealer"
means a person engaged in the retail sale of motor vehicle fuel.

(6)
"Department" means the department of licensing.

(7)
"Director" means the director of licensing.

(8) "Evasion"
or "evade" means to diminish or avoid the computation, assessment, or
payment of authorized taxes or fees through:

(a) A knowing: False
statement; misrepresentation of fact; or other act of deception; or

(b) An intentional:
Omission; failure to file a return or report; or other act of deception.

(9) "Export"
means to obtain motor vehicle fuel in this state for sales or distribution
outside the state.

(10)
"Highway" means every way or place open to the use of the public, as
a matter of right, for the purpose of vehicular travel.

(11) "Import"
means to bring motor vehicle fuel into this state by a means of conveyance
other than the fuel supply tank of a motor vehicle.

(12)
"Licensee" means a person holding a license issued under this chapter.

(13) "Marine fuel
dealer" means a person engaged in the retail sale of motor vehicle fuel
whose place of business and/or sale outlet is located upon a navigable
waterway.

(14) "Motor
vehicle fuel blender" means a person who produces blended motor fuel
outside the bulk transfer-terminal system.

(15) "Motor
vehicle fuel distributor" means a person who acquires motor vehicle fuel
from a supplier, distributor, or licensee for subsequent sale and distribution.

(16) "Motor
vehicle fuel exporter" means a person who purchases motor vehicle fuel in
this state and directly exports the fuel by a means other than the bulk
transfer-terminal system to a destination outside of the state. If the
exporter of record is acting as an agent, the person for whom the agent is
acting is the exporter. If there is no exporter of record, the owner of the
motor fuel at the time of exportation is the exporter.

(17) "Motor
vehicle fuel importer" means a person who imports motor vehicle fuel into
the state by a means other than the bulk transfer-terminal system. If the
importer of record is acting as an agent, the person for whom the agent is
acting is the importer. If there is no importer of record, the owner of the
motor vehicle fuel at the time of importation is the importer.

(18) "Motor
vehicle fuel supplier" means a person who owns and stores motor vehicle
fuel in a terminal facility or who refines and stores motor vehicle fuel at a
refinery.

(19) "Motor
vehicle" means a self-propelled vehicle designed for operation upon land
utilizing motor vehicle fuel as the means of propulsion.

(20) "Motor
vehicle fuel" means gasoline and any other inflammable gas or liquid, by
whatsoever name the gasoline, gas, or liquid may be known or sold, the chief
use of which is as fuel for the propulsion of motor vehicles or motorboats.

(21) "Person"
means a natural person, fiduciary, association, or corporation. The term
"person" as applied to an association means and includes the partners
or members thereof, and as applied to corporations, the officers thereof.

(22) "Position
holder" means a person who holds the inventory position in motor vehicle
fuel, as reflected by the records of the terminal operator. A person holds the
inventory position in motor vehicle fuel if the person has a contractual
agreement with the terminal for the use of storage facilities and terminating
services at a terminal with respect to motor vehicle fuel. "Position
holder" includes a terminal operator that owns motor vehicle fuel in their
terminal.

(23) "Rack"
means a mechanism for delivering motor vehicle fuel from a refinery or terminal
into a truck, trailer, railcar, or other means of nonbulk transfer.

(24)
"Refiner" means a person who owns, operates, or otherwise controls a
refinery.

(25)
"Removal" means a physical transfer of motor vehicle fuel other than
by evaporation, loss, or destruction.

(26)
"Terminal" means a motor vehicle fuel storage and distribution
facility that has been assigned a terminal control number by the internal
revenue service, is supplied by pipeline or vessel, and from which reportable
motor vehicle fuel is removed at a rack.

(27) "Terminal
operator" means a person who owns, operates, or otherwise controls a
terminal.

(28) "Two-party
exchange" or "buy-sell agreement" means a transaction in which
taxable motor vehicle fuel is transferred from one licensed supplier to another
licensed supplier under an exchange or buy-sell agreement whereby the supplier
that is the position holder agrees to deliver taxable motor vehicle fuel to the
other supplier or the other supplier's customer at the rack of the terminal at
which the delivering supplier is the position holder.

(29) "Ultralow
sulfur fuel" means diesel fuel with a sulfur content of thirty parts per
million or less.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
2. A new section is added
to chapter 82.36 RCW to read as follows:

Motor vehicle operators
using ultralow sulfur fuel, as defined in RCW 82.36.010, will receive a motor
vehicle fuel tax refund of five cents for each gallon of motor vehicle fuel
used, whether the vehicle fuel tax has been paid to the vendor from whom the
motor vehicle fuel was purchased or indirectly by adding the tax to the price of
the fuel.

This section expires
September 1, 2006.

Sec. 3. RCW 82.34.010 and 1988 c
127 s 36 are each amended to read as follows:

Unless a different
meaning is plainly required by the context, the following words as hereinafter
used in this chapter shall have the following meanings:

(1)
"Facility" shall mean an "air pollution control facility"
or a "water pollution control facility" as herein defined: (a)
"Air pollution control facility" includes any treatment works,
control devices and disposal systems, machinery, equipment, structures,
property or any part or accessories thereof, installed or acquired for the
primary purpose of reducing, controlling or disposing of industrial waste which
if released to the outdoor atmosphere could cause air pollution. "Air
pollution control facility" shall not mean any motor vehicle air pollution
control devices used to control the emission of air contaminants from any motor
vehicle, except for particulate traps and catalysts retrofitted on
heavy-duty diesel engines with a model year of 2004 or earlier. Emissions by
motor vehicles powered by heavy-duty diesel engines shall, as necessary, be
considered "industrial waste" to carry out the intent of this chapter.
(b) "Water pollution control facility" includes any treatment works,
control device or disposal system, machinery, equipment, structures, property
or any accessories thereof installed or acquired for the primary purpose of
reducing, controlling or disposing of sewage and industrial waste which if
released to a water course could cause water pollution: PROVIDED, That the
word "facility" shall not be construed to include any control device,
machinery, equipment, structure, disposal system or other property installed or
constructed: For a municipal corporation other than for coal-fired, steam
electric generating plants constructed and operated pursuant to chapter 54.44
RCW for which an application for a certificate was made no later than December
31, 1969, together with any air or water pollution control facility improvement
which may be made hereafter to such plants; or for the primary purpose of
connecting any commercial establishment with the waste collecting facilities of
public or privately owned utilities: PROVIDED FURTHER, That the word
"facility" shall not include any control device, machinery,
equipment, structure, disposal system, or other property installed or
constructed with the proceeds derived from the sale of industrial revenue bonds
issued under chapter 39.84 RCW.

(2) "Industrial
waste" shall mean any liquid, gaseous, radioactive or solid waste
substance or combinations thereof resulting from any process of industry,
manufacture, trade or business, or from the development or recovery of any
natural resources.

(3) "Treatment
works" or "control device" shall mean any machinery, equipment,
structure or property which is installed, constructed or acquired for the
primary purpose of controlling air or water pollution and shall include, but
shall not be limited to such devices as precipitators, scrubbers, towers,
filters, baghouses, incinerators, evaporators, reservoirs, aerators used for
the purpose of treating, stabilizing, incinerating, holding, removing or
isolating sewage and industrial wastes.

(4) "Disposal
system" shall mean any system containing treatment works or control
devices and includes but is not limited to pipelines, outfalls, conduits,
pumping stations, force mains, solids handling equipment, instrumentation and
monitoring equipment, ducts, fans, vents, hoods and conveyors and all other
construction, devices, appurtenances and facilities used for collecting or
conducting, sewage and industrial waste to a point of disposal, treatment or
isolation except that which is necessary to manufacture of products.

(5)
"Certificate" shall mean a pollution control tax exemption and credit
certificate for which application has been made not later than December 31,
1969, except as follows:

(a) With respect to a
facility required to be installed, such application will be deemed timely made
if made not later than November 30, 1981, and within one year after the
effective date of specific requirements for such facility promulgated by the
appropriate control agency.

(b) With respect to a
water pollution control facility for which an application was made in
anticipation of specific requirements for such facility being promulgated by
the appropriate control agency, an application will be deemed timely made if
made during November, 1981, and subsequently denied, and if an appeal of the
agency's denial of the application was filed in a timely manner.

(c) With respect to a
facility for which plans and specifications were approved by the appropriate
control agency, an application will be deemed timely made if made during
November, 1981, and subsequently denied, and if an appeal of the agency's
denial of the application was filed in a timely manner.

(d) With respect to
the particulate and catalysts retrofitted on heavy-duty diesel engines with a
model year of 2004 or earlier, as provided in RCW 82.34.050, an application
will be deemed timely made if made not later than September 1, 2006.

(e) For the
purposes of (a), (b), and (c) of this subsection, "facility" means a
facility installed in an industrial, manufacturing, waste disposal, utility, or
other commercial establishment which is in operation or under construction as
of July 30, 1967.

(6) "Appropriate
control agency" shall mean the department of ecology; or the operating
local or regional air pollution control agency within whose jurisdiction a
facility is or will be located, or the department of ecology, where the
facility is not or will not be located within the area of an operating local or
regional air pollution control agency, or where the department of ecology has
assumed jurisdiction.

(7)
"Department" shall mean the department of revenue.

Sec. 4. RCW 82.34.020 and 1981
2nd ex.s. c 9 s 2 are each amended to read as follows:

An
application for a certificate shall be filed with the department not later than
November 30, 1981, except that applications for certificates described in
RCW 82.34.010(5)(d) shall be filed not later than September 1, 2006, and in
such manner and in such form as may be prescribed by the department. The
application shall contain estimated or actual costs, plans and specifications
of the facility including all materials incorporated or to be incorporated
therein and a list describing, and showing the cost, of all equipment acquired
or to be acquired by the applicant for the purpose of pollution control,
together with the operating procedure for the facility, or a time schedule for
the acquisition and installation or attachment of the facility and the proposed
operating procedure for such facility.

---
END ---