BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF
WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1. RCW 41.45.010 and 1998 c
341 s 401 are each amended to read as follows:

It is the intent of the
legislature to provide a dependable and systematic process for funding the
benefits provided to members and retirees of the public employees' retirement
system, chapter 41.40 RCW; the teachers' retirement system, chapter 41.32 RCW;
the law enforcement officers' and fire fighters' retirement systems,
chapters 41.26 and 41.26A RCW; the school employees' retirement
system, chapter 41.35 RCW; and the Washington state patrol retirement system,
chapter 43.43 RCW.

The legislature
finds that the funding status of the state retirement systems has improved
dramatically since 1989. Because of the big reduction in unfunded pension
liabilities, it is now prudent to adjust the long-term economic assumptions
that are used in the actuarial studies conducted by the state actuary. The
legislature finds that it is reasonable to increase the salary growth
assumption in light of Initiative Measure No. 732 and to increase the
investment return assumption in light of the asset allocation policies and
historical returns of the state investment board.

The funding process
established by this chapter is intended to achieve the following goals:

(1) To continue to
fully fund the public employees' retirement system plan 2, the teachers'
retirement system plans 2 and 3, the school employees' retirement system plans
2 and 3, and the law enforcement officers' and fire fighters' retirement system
plan 2 as provided by law;

(2) To fully amortize
the total costs of the public employees' retirement system plan 1((,)) and
the teachers' retirement system plan 1((, and the law enforcement officers'
and fire fighters' retirement system plan 1)) not later than June 30, 2024;

(3) To ensure the
actuarial funding of the restated law enforcement officers' and fire fighters'
retirement system defined benefit plan, and provide for additional state
funding if unfunded liabilities accrue in the future;

(4) To establish
predictable long-term employer contribution rates which will remain a
relatively constant proportion of the future state budgets; and

(((4))) (5)
To fund, to the extent feasible, benefit increases for plan 1 members and all
benefits for plan 2 and 3 members over the working lives of those members so
that the cost of those benefits are paid by the taxpayers who receive the
benefit of those members' service.

Sec. 2. RCW 41.45.010 and 2000 c
247 s 501 are each amended to read as follows:

It is the intent of the
legislature to provide a dependable and systematic process for funding the
benefits provided to members and retirees of the public employees' retirement
system, chapter 41.40 RCW; the teachers' retirement system, chapter 41.32 RCW;
the law enforcement officers' and fire fighters' retirement systems,
chapters 41.26 and 41.26A RCW; the school employees' retirement
system, chapter 41.35 RCW; and the Washington state patrol retirement system,
chapter 43.43 RCW.

The legislature
finds that the funding status of the state retirement systems has improved
dramatically since 1989. Because of the big reduction in unfunded pension
liabilities, it is now prudent to adjust the long-term economic assumptions
that are used in the actuarial studies conducted by the state actuary. The
legislature finds that it is reasonable to increase the salary growth
assumption in light of Initiative Measure No. 732, to increase the investment
return assumption in light of the asset allocation policies and historical
returns of the state investment board, and to reestablish June 30, 2024, as the
target date to achieve full funding of all liabilities in the public employees'
retirement system plan 1 and the teachers' retirement system plan 1.

The funding process
established by this chapter is intended to achieve the following goals:

(1) To continue to
fully fund the public employees' retirement system plans 2 and 3, the teachers'
retirement system plans 2 and 3, the school employees' retirement system plans
2 and 3, and the law enforcement officers' and fire fighters' retirement system
plan 2 as provided by law;

(2) To fully amortize
the total costs of the public employees' retirement system plan 1((,)) and
the teachers' retirement system plan 1, ((and the law enforcement officers'
and fire fighters' retirement system plan 1)) not later than June 30, 2024;

(3) To ensure the
actuarial funding of the restated law enforcement officers' and fire fighters'
retirement system defined benefit plan, and provide for additional state
funding if unfunded liabilities accrue in the future;

(4) To establish
predictable long-term employer contribution rates which will remain a
relatively constant proportion of the future state budgets; and

(((4))) (5)
To fund, to the extent feasible, benefit increases for plan 1 members and all
benefits for plan 2 and 3 members over the working lives of those members so
that the cost of those benefits are paid by the taxpayers who receive the
benefit of those members' service.

Sec. 3. RCW 41.45.020 and 1998 c
341 s 402 and 1998 c 283 s 1 are each reenacted and amended to read as follows:

As used in this
chapter, the following terms have the meanings indicated unless the context
clearly requires otherwise.

(1) "Council"
means the pension funding council created in RCW 41.45.100.

(2)
"Department" means the department of retirement systems.

(3) "Law
enforcement officers' and fire fighters' retirement system ((plan 1"
and "law enforcement officers' and fire fighters' retirement system))
plan 2" means the benefits and funding provisions under chapter
41.26 RCW.

(4) "Restated
law enforcement officers' and fire fighters' retirement system defined benefit
plan" means the benefits and funding provisions under chapter 41.26A RCW.

(5) "Public
employees' retirement system plan 1" and "public employees'
retirement system plan 2" mean the benefits and funding provisions under
chapter 41.40 RCW.

(((5))) (6)
"Teachers' retirement system plan 1," "teachers' retirement
system plan 2," and "teachers' retirement system plan 3" mean
the benefits and funding provisions under chapter 41.32 RCW.

(((6))) (7)
"School employees' retirement system plan 2" and "school
employees' retirement system plan 3" mean the benefits and funding
provisions under chapter 41.35 RCW.

(((7))) (8)
"Washington state patrol retirement system" means the retirement
benefits provided under chapter 43.43 RCW.

(((8))) (9)
"Unfunded liability" means the unfunded actuarial accrued liability
of a retirement system.

(((9))) (10)
"Actuary" or "state actuary" means the state actuary employed
under chapter 44.44 RCW.

(((10))) (11)
"State retirement systems" means the retirement systems listed in RCW
41.50.030.

(((11) "Work
group" means the pension funding work group created in RCW 41.45.120.))

(12) "Classified
employee" means a member of the Washington school employees' retirement
system plan 2 or plan 3 as defined in RCW 41.35.010.

(13)
"Teacher" means a member of the teachers' retirement system as
defined in RCW 41.32.010(15).

Sec. 4. RCW 41.45.020 and 2000 c
247 s 502 are each amended to read as follows:

As used in this
chapter, the following terms have the meanings indicated unless the context
clearly requires otherwise.

(1) "Council"
means the pension funding council created in RCW 41.45.100.

(2)
"Department" means the department of retirement systems.

(3) "Law
enforcement officers' and fire fighters' retirement system ((plan 1"
and "law enforcement officers' and fire fighters' retirement system))
plan 2" means the benefits and funding provisions under chapter
41.26 RCW.

(4) "Restated
law enforcement officers' and fire fighters' retirement system defined benefit
plan" means the benefits and funding provisions under chapter 41.26A RCW.

(5) "Public
employees' retirement system plan 1," "public employees' retirement
system plan 2," and "public employees' retirement system plan 3"
mean the benefits and funding provisions under chapter 41.40 RCW.

(((5))) (6)
"Teachers' retirement system plan 1," "teachers' retirement
system plan 2," and "teachers' retirement system plan 3" mean
the benefits and funding provisions under chapter 41.32 RCW.

(((6))) (7)
"School employees' retirement system plan 2" and "school
employees' retirement system plan 3" mean the benefits and funding
provisions under chapter 41.35 RCW.

(((7))) (8)
"Washington state patrol retirement system" means the retirement
benefits provided under chapter 43.43 RCW.

(((8))) (9)
"Unfunded liability" means the unfunded actuarial accrued liability
of a retirement system.

(((9))) (10)
"Actuary" or "state actuary" means the state actuary
employed under chapter 44.44 RCW.

(((10))) (11)
"State retirement systems" means the retirement systems listed in RCW
41.50.030.

(((11) "Work
group" means the pension funding work group created in RCW 41.45.120.))

(12) "Classified
employee" means a member of the Washington school employees' retirement
system plan 2 or plan 3 as defined in RCW 41.35.010.

(13)
"Teacher" means a member of the teachers' retirement system as
defined in RCW 41.32.010(15).

Sec. 5. RCW 41.45.030 and 1995 c
233 s 1 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) Beginning ((September))
April 1, ((1995)) 2004, and every ((two)) four
years thereafter, the state actuary shall submit to the council information
regarding the experience and financial condition of each state retirement
system. The council shall review this and such other information as it may
require.

(2) By ((December))
May 31, ((1995)) 2004, and every ((two)) four
years thereafter, the council, by affirmative vote of ((five)) four
councilmembers, ((shall)) may adopt changes to the ((following))
long-term economic assumptions((:

(a) Growth in system
membership;

(b) Growth in
salaries, exclusive of merit or longevity increases;

(c) Growth in
inflation; and

(d) Investment rate
of return)) established in
section 6 of this act. Any changes adopted by the council shall be
subject to revision by the legislature.

The council shall ((work))
consult with the ((department of retirement systems, the state
actuary,)) economic and revenue forecast supervisor and the
executive director of the state investment board, and shall consider long-term
historical averages, in ((developing)) reviewing possible changes to
the economic assumptions.

(3) The assumptions ((adopted))
and the asset value smoothing technique established in section 6 of this
act, as modified in the future by the council or legislature, shall
be used by the state actuary in conducting all actuarial studies of the state
retirement systems, including actuarial fiscal notes under RCW 44.44.040.
The assumptions shall also be used for the administration of benefits under the
retirement plans listed in RCW 41.45.020, pursuant to timelines and conditions
established by department rules.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
6. A new section is added
to chapter 41.45 RCW to read as follows:

(1) Beginning July 1,
2001, the following long-term economic assumptions shall be used by the state
actuary for the purposes of RCW 41.45.030:

(a) The growth in
inflation assumption shall be 3.5 percent;

(b) The growth in
salaries assumption, exclusive of merit or longevity increases, shall be 4.5
percent;

(c) The investment rate
of return assumption shall be 8 percent; and

(d) The growth in
system membership assumption shall be 1.25 percent for the public employees'
retirement system, the school employees' retirement system, and the law
enforcement officers' and fire fighters' retirement system. The assumption
shall be .90 percent for the teachers' retirement system.

(2) Beginning with
actuarial studies done after July 1, 2001, changes to plan asset values that
vary from the long-term investment rate of return assumption shall be
recognized over a four-year period. Beginning April 1, 2004, the council, by
affirmative vote of four councilmembers, may adopt changes to this asset value
smoothing technique. Any changes adopted by the council shall be subject to
revision by the legislature.

Sec. 7. RCW 41.45.050 and 1998 c
341 s 403 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) Employers of
members of the public employees' retirement system, the teachers' retirement
system, the school employees' retirement system, and the Washington state
patrol retirement system shall make contributions to those systems based on the
rates established in RCW 41.45.060, section 9 of this act, and 41.45.070.

(2) The state shall
make contributions to the law enforcement officers' and fire fighters'
retirement system plan 2 based on the rates established in RCW 41.45.060,
section 9 of this act, and 41.45.070. The state treasurer shall transfer
the required contributions each month on the basis of salary data provided by
the department.

(3) The state shall
ensure the systematic actuarial funding of the restated law enforcement
officers' and fire fighters' retirement system defined benefit plan in the manner
provided by chapter 41.26A RCW.

(4) The
department shall bill employers, and the state shall make contributions to the
law enforcement officers' and fire fighters' retirement system plan 2,
using the combined rates established in RCW 41.45.060, section 9 of this
act, and 41.45.070 regardless of the level of ((pension funding)) appropriation
provided in the biennial budget. Any member of an affected retirement system
may, by mandamus or other appropriate proceeding, require the transfer and
payment of funds as directed in this section.

(((4))) (5)
The contributions received for the public employees' retirement system shall be
allocated between the public employees' retirement system plan 1 fund and
public employees' retirement system plan 2 fund as follows: The contributions
necessary to fully fund the public employees' retirement system plan 2 employer
contribution required by RCW 41.40.650 shall first be deposited in the public
employees' retirement system plan 2 fund. All remaining public employees'
retirement system employer contributions shall be deposited in the public
employees' retirement system plan 1 fund.

(((5))) (6)
The contributions received for the teachers' retirement system shall be
allocated between the plan 1 fund and the combined plan 2 and plan 3 fund as
follows: The contributions necessary to fully fund the combined plan 2 and
plan 3 employer contribution shall first be deposited in the combined plan 2
and plan 3 fund. All remaining teachers' retirement system employer contributions
shall be deposited in the plan 1 fund.

(((6))) (7)
The contributions received for the school employees' retirement system shall be
allocated between the public employees' retirement system plan 1 fund and the
school employees' retirement system combined plan 2 and plan 3 fund as
follows: The contributions necessary to fully fund the combined plan 2 and
plan 3 employer contribution shall first be deposited in the combined plan 2
and plan 3 fund. All remaining school employees' retirement system employer
contributions shall be deposited in the public employees' retirement system
plan 1 fund.

(((7))) (8)
The contributions received ((under RCW 41.26.450)) for the law
enforcement officers' and fire fighters' retirement system plan 2 shall
be ((allocated between the law enforcement officers' and fire fighters'
retirement system plan 1 and the law enforcement officers' and fire fighters'
retirement system plan 2 fund as follows: The contributions necessary to fully
fund the law enforcement officers' and fire fighters' retirement system plan 2
employer contributions shall be first)) deposited in the law enforcement
officers' and fire fighters' retirement system plan 2 fund. ((All remaining
law enforcement officers' and fire fighters' retirement system employer
contributions shall be deposited in the law enforcement officers' and fire
fighters' retirement system plan 1 fund.))

Sec. 8. RCW 41.45.050 and 2000 c
247 s 503 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) Employers of
members of the public employees' retirement system, the teachers' retirement
system, the school employees' retirement system, and the Washington state
patrol retirement system shall make contributions to those systems based on the
rates established in RCW 41.45.060, section 9 of this act, and
41.45.070.

(2) The state shall
make contributions to the law enforcement officers' and fire fighters'
retirement system plan 2 based on the rates established in RCW 41.45.060,
section 9 of this act, and 41.45.070. The state treasurer shall transfer
the required contributions each month on the basis of salary data provided by
the department.

(3) The state shall
ensure the systematic actuarial funding of the restated law enforcement
officers' and fire fighters' retirement system defined benefit plan in the
manner provided by chapter 41.26A RCW.

(4) The
department shall bill employers, and the state shall make contributions to the
law enforcement officers' and fire fighters' retirement system plan 2, using
the combined rates established in RCW 41.45.060, section 9 of this act,
and 41.45.070 regardless of the level of ((pension funding)) appropriation
provided in the biennial budget. Any member of an affected retirement system
may, by mandamus or other appropriate proceeding, require the transfer and
payment of funds as directed in this section.

(((4))) (5)
The contributions received for the public employees' retirement system shall be
allocated between the public employees' retirement system plan 1 fund and the
public employees' retirement system combined plan 2 and plan 3 fund as
follows: The contributions necessary to fully fund the public employees'
retirement system combined plan 2 and plan 3 employer contribution shall first
be deposited in the public employees' retirement system combined plan 2 and
plan 3 fund. All remaining public employees' retirement system employer
contributions shall be deposited in the public employees' retirement system
plan 1 fund.

(((5))) (6)
The contributions received for the teachers' retirement system shall be
allocated between the plan 1 fund and the combined plan 2 and plan 3 fund as
follows: The contributions necessary to fully fund the combined plan 2 and
plan 3 employer contribution shall first be deposited in the combined plan 2
and plan 3 fund. All remaining teachers' retirement system employer
contributions shall be deposited in the plan 1 fund.

(((6))) (7)
The contributions received for the school employees' retirement system shall be
allocated between the public employees' retirement system plan 1 fund and the
school employees' retirement system combined plan 2 and plan 3 fund as
follows: The contributions necessary to fully fund the combined plan 2 and
plan 3 employer contribution shall first be deposited in the combined plan 2
and plan 3 fund. All remaining school employees' retirement system employer
contributions shall be deposited in the public employees' retirement system
plan 1 fund.

(((7))) (8)
The contributions received ((under RCW 41.45.060, 41.45.061, and 41.45.067))
for the law enforcement officers' and fire fighters' retirement system plan
2 shall be ((allocated between the law enforcement officers' and fire
fighters' retirement system plan 1 and the law enforcement officers' and fire
fighters' retirement system plan 2 fund as follows: The contributions
necessary to fully fund the law enforcement officers' and fire fighters'
retirement system plan 2 employer contributions shall be first)) deposited
in the law enforcement officers' and fire fighters' retirement system plan 2
fund. ((All remaining law enforcement officers' and fire fighters'
retirement system employer contributions shall be deposited in the law
enforcement officers' and fire fighters' retirement system plan 1 fund.))

NEW SECTION. Sec.
9. A new section is added
to chapter 41.45 RCW to read as follows:

(1) The basic employer
and state contribution rates, and plan 2 member contribution rates, are changed
to reflect the 1999 combined actuarial valuation studies conducted by the
office of the state actuary, adjusted solely for the changes in the long-term
economic assumptions contained in section 6 of this act, and for the
reestablishment of the June 30, 2024, target date for funding all plan 1 liabilities.

Beginning July 1, 2001,
the following employer contribution rates shall be charged:

(a) 1.54 percent for
the public employees' retirement system; and

(b) 2.70 percent for
the law enforcement officers' and fire fighters' retirement system plan 2.

(2) Beginning July 1,
2001, the basic state contribution rate for the law enforcement officers' and
fire fighters' retirement system plan 2 shall be 1.80 percent.

(3) Beginning September
1, 2001, the following employer contribution rates shall be charged:

(a) 1.54 percent for
the school employees' retirement system; and

(b) 2.75 percent for
the teachers' retirement system.

(4) Beginning July 1,
2001, the following member contribution rates shall be charged:

(a) 0.88 percent for
the public employees' retirement system plan 2; and

(b) 4.50 percent for
the law enforcement officers' and fire fighters' retirement system plan 2.

(5) Beginning September
1, 2001, the following member contribution rates shall be charged:

(a) 0.88 percent for
the school employees' retirement system plan 2; and

(b) 1.23 percent for
the teachers' retirement system plan 2.

(6) The contribution
rates in this section shall be collected through June 30, 2003.

Sec. 10. RCW 41.45.060 and 2000
2nd sp.s. c 1 s 905 and 2000 c 247 s 504 are each reenacted and amended to read
as follows:

(1) The state actuary
shall provide actuarial valuation results based on the economic
assumptions and asset value smoothing technique included in section 6 of
this act or adopted by the council under RCW 41.45.030 or section
6 of this act.

(2) Not later than
September 30, ((1998)) 2002, and every two years thereafter,
consistent with the economic assumptions and asset value smoothing
technique included in section 6 of this act or adopted under RCW 41.45.030 or
section 6 of this act, the council shall adopt and may make changes to:

(a) A basic state
contribution rate for the law enforcement officers' and fire fighters'
retirement system plan 2;

(b) Basic employer
contribution rates for the public employees' retirement system, the teachers'
retirement system, and the Washington state patrol retirement system ((to be
used in the ensuing biennial period)); and

(c) A basic employer
contribution rate for the school employees' retirement system for funding both
that system and the public employees' retirement system plan 1.

((For the 1999-2001
fiscal biennium, the rates adopted by the council shall be effective for the
period designated in section 902, chapter 1, Laws of 2000 2nd sp. sess. and RCW
41.45.0602.)) The contribution rates adopted by the council shall be
subject to revision by the legislature.

(3) The employer and
state contribution rates adopted by the council shall be the level percentages
of pay that are needed:

(a) To fully amortize
the total costs of the public employees' retirement system plan 1, the
teachers' retirement system plan 1, ((the law enforcement officers' and fire
fighters' retirement system plan 1,)) and the unfunded liability of the
Washington state patrol retirement system not later than June 30, 2024((,
except as provided in subsection (5) of this section));

(b) To also continue to
fully fund the public employees' retirement system plans 2 and 3, the teachers'
retirement system plans 2 and 3, the school employees' retirement system plans
2 and 3, and the law enforcement officers' and fire fighters' retirement system
plan 2 in accordance with RCW 41.45.061, 41.45.067, and this section; and

(c) For the law
enforcement officers' and fire fighters' system plan 2 the rate charged to
employers, except as provided in RCW 41.26.450, shall be thirty percent of the
cost of the retirement system and the rate charged to the state shall be twenty
percent of the cost of the retirement system.

(4) The aggregate
actuarial cost method shall be used to calculate a combined plan 2 and 3
employer contribution rate.

(5) ((An amount
equal to the amount of extraordinary investment gains as defined in RCW
41.31.020 shall be used to shorten the amortization period for the public
employees' retirement system plan 1 and the teachers' retirement system plan 1.

(6))) The council shall immediately notify the
directors of the office of financial management and department of retirement
systems of the state and employer contribution rates adopted. The rates
shall be effective for the ensuing biennial period, subject to any legislative
modifications.

(((7))) (6)
The director of the department of retirement systems shall collect the rates
established in section 9 of this act through June 30, 2003. Thereafter, the
director shall collect those rates adopted by the council. The rates
established in section 9 of this act, or by the council, are subject to
revision by the legislature.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
11. RCW 41.45.0602 is
decodified.

Sec. 12. RCW 41.45.061 and 2000 c
230 s 2 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) The required
contribution rate for members of the plan 2 teachers' retirement system shall
be fixed at the rates in effect on July 1, 1996, subject to the following:

(a) Beginning September
1, 1997, except as provided in (b) of this subsection, the employee
contribution rate shall not exceed the employer plan 2 and 3 rates adopted
under RCW 41.45.060, section 9 of this act, and 41.45.070 for the
teachers' retirement system;

(b) In addition, the
employee contribution rate for plan 2 shall be increased by fifty percent of
the contribution rate increase caused by any plan 2 benefit increase passed
after July 1, 1996;

(c) In addition, the
employee contribution rate for plan 2 shall not be increased as a result of any
distributions pursuant to section 309, chapter 341, Laws of 1998 and RCW
41.31A.020.

(2) The required
contribution rate for members of the school employees' retirement system plan 2
shall equal the school employees' retirement system employer plan 2 and 3
contribution rate adopted under RCW 41.45.060, section 9 of this act,
and 41.45.070, except as provided in subsection (3) of this section.

(3) The employee
contribution rate for plan 2 shall not be increased as a result of any
distributions pursuant to RCW 41.31A.020 and 41.31A.030.

(4) The required plan 2
and 3 contribution rates for employers shall be adopted in the manner described
in RCW 41.45.060, section 9 of this act, and RCW 41.45.070.

Sec. 13. RCW 41.45.061 and 2000 c
247 s 506 and 2000 c 230 s 2 are each reenacted and amended to read as follows:

(1) The required
contribution rate for members of the plan 2 teachers' retirement system shall
be fixed at the rates in effect on July 1, 1996, subject to the following:

(a) Beginning September
1, 1997, except as provided in (b) of this subsection, the employee
contribution rate shall not exceed the employer plan 2 and 3 rates adopted
under RCW 41.45.060, section 9 of this act, and 41.45.070 for the
teachers' retirement system;

(b) In addition, the
employee contribution rate for plan 2 shall be increased by fifty percent of
the contribution rate increase caused by any plan 2 benefit increase passed
after July 1, 1996;

(c) In addition, the
employee contribution rate for plan 2 shall not be increased as a result of any
distributions pursuant to section 309, chapter 341, Laws of 1998 and RCW
41.31A.020.

(2) The required
contribution rate for members of the school employees' retirement system plan 2
shall equal the school employees' retirement system employer plan 2 and 3
contribution rate adopted under RCW 41.45.060, section 9 of this act,
and 41.45.070, except as provided in subsection (5) of this section.

(3) The required
contribution rate for members of the public employees' retirement system plan 2
shall be set at the same rate as the employer combined plan 2 and plan 3 rate.

(4) The required
contribution rate for members of the law enforcement officers' and fire
fighters' retirement system plan 2 shall be set at fifty percent of the cost of
the retirement system.

(5) The employee
contribution rates for plan 2 under subsections (3) and (4) of this section
shall not include any increase as a result of any distributions pursuant to RCW
41.31A.020 and 41.31A.030.

(6) The required plan 2
and 3 contribution rates for employers shall be adopted in the manner described
in RCW 41.45.060, section 9 of this act, and 41.45.070.

Sec. 14. RCW 41.45.067 and 2000 c
247 s 507 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) Any increase in the
contribution rate required as the result of a failure of the state or of an
employer to make any contribution required by this section shall be borne in
full by the state or by that employer not making the contribution.

(2) The director shall notify
all employers of any pending adjustment in the required contribution rate and
such pending adjustment in the required contribution rate and any increase
shall be announced at least thirty days prior to the effective date of the
change.

(3) Members'
contributions required by RCW 41.45.060 and 41.45.061 shall be deducted from
the members' compensation each payroll period. The members' contribution and
the employers' contribution shall be remitted directly to the department within
fifteen days following the end of the calendar month during which the payroll
period ends.

(4) The state's
contribution required for the law enforcement officers' and fire fighters'
retirement system plan 2 shall be transferred to the appropriate fund from the
total contributions transferred by the state treasurer under RCW ((41.45.060
and 41.45.070)) 41.45.050.

Sec. 15. RCW 41.45.070 and 1998 c
340 s 10 and 1998 c 341 s 406 are each reenacted and amended to read as
follows:

(1) In addition to the
basic employer contribution rate established in RCW 41.45.060 or section 9
of this act, the department shall also charge employers of public
employees' retirement system, teachers' retirement system, school employees'
retirement system, or Washington state patrol retirement system members an
additional supplemental rate to pay for the cost of additional benefits, if
any, granted to members of those systems. Except as provided in subsection (6)
and (7) of this section, the supplemental contribution rates required by this
section shall be calculated by the state actuary and shall be charged
regardless of language to the contrary contained in the statute which
authorizes additional benefits.

(2) In addition to the
basic state contribution rate established in RCW 41.45.060 or section 9 of
this act for the law enforcement officers' and fire fighters' retirement
system plan 2, the department shall also establish a supplemental rate
to pay for the cost of additional benefits, if any, granted to members of the law
enforcement officers' and fire fighters' retirement system plan 2.
Except as provided in subsection (6) of this section, this supplemental rate
shall be calculated by the state actuary and the state treasurer shall transfer
the additional required contributions regardless of language to the contrary
contained in the statute which authorizes the additional benefits.

(3) The supplemental
rate charged under this section to fund benefit increases provided to active
members of the public employees' retirement system plan 1, the teachers'
retirement system plan 1, ((the law enforcement officers' and fire fighters'
retirement system plan 1,)) and Washington state patrol retirement system,
shall be calculated as the level percentage of all members' pay needed to fund
the cost of the benefit not later than June 30, 2024.

(4) The supplemental
rate charged under this section to fund benefit increases provided to active
and retired members of the public employees' retirement system plan 2, the
teachers' retirement system plan 2 and plan 3, the school employees' retirement
system plan 2 and plan 3, or the law enforcement officers' and fire fighters'
retirement system plan 2, shall be calculated as the level percentage of all
members' pay needed to fund the cost of the benefit, as calculated under RCW
41.40.650 or 41.26.450, respectively.

(5) The supplemental
rate charged under this section to fund postretirement adjustments which are
provided on a nonautomatic basis to current retirees shall be calculated as the
percentage of pay needed to fund the adjustments as they are paid to the
retirees. The supplemental rate charged under this section to fund automatic
postretirement adjustments for active or retired members of the public
employees' retirement system plan 1 and the teachers' retirement system plan 1
shall be calculated as the level percentage of pay needed to fund the cost of
the automatic adjustments not later than June 30, 2024.

(6) A supplemental rate
shall not be charged to pay for the cost of additional benefits granted to
members pursuant to chapter 340, Laws of 1998.

(7) A supplemental rate
shall not be charged to pay for the cost of additional benefits granted to
members pursuant to chapter 41.31A RCW; section 309, chapter 341, Laws of 1998;
or section 701, chapter 341, Laws of 1998.

Sec. 16. RCW 41.45.070 and 2000 c
247 s 505 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) In addition to the
basic employer contribution rate established in RCW 41.45.060 or section 9
of this act, the department shall also charge employers of public
employees' retirement system, teachers' retirement system, school employees'
retirement system, or Washington state patrol retirement system members an
additional supplemental rate to pay for the cost of additional benefits, if
any, granted to members of those systems. Except as provided in subsections
(6) and (7) of this section, the supplemental contribution rates required by
this section shall be calculated by the state actuary and shall be charged
regardless of language to the contrary contained in the statute which
authorizes additional benefits.

(2) In addition to the
basic state contribution rate established in RCW 41.45.060 or section 9 of
this act for the law enforcement officers' and fire fighters' retirement
system plan 2, the department shall also establish a supplemental rate
to pay for the cost of additional benefits, if any, granted to members of the
law enforcement officers' and fire fighters' retirement system plan 2.
Except as provided in subsection (6) of this section, this supplemental rate
shall be calculated by the state actuary and the state treasurer shall transfer
the additional required contributions regardless of language to the contrary
contained in the statute which authorizes the additional benefits.

(3) The supplemental
rate charged under this section to fund benefit increases provided to active
members of the public employees' retirement system plan 1, the teachers'
retirement system plan 1, ((the law enforcement officers' and fire fighters'
retirement system plan 1,)) and Washington state patrol retirement system,
shall be calculated as the level percentage of all members' pay needed to fund
the cost of the benefit not later than June 30, 2024.

(4) The supplemental
rate charged under this section to fund benefit increases provided to active
and retired members of the public employees' retirement system plan 2 and plan
3, the teachers' retirement system plan 2 and plan 3, the school employees'
retirement system plan 2 and plan 3, or the law enforcement officers' and fire
fighters' retirement system plan 2, shall be calculated as the level percentage
of all members' pay needed to fund the cost of the benefit, as calculated under
RCW 41.45.060, 41.45.061, or 41.45.067.

(5) The supplemental
rate charged under this section to fund postretirement adjustments which are
provided on a nonautomatic basis to current retirees shall be calculated as the
percentage of pay needed to fund the adjustments as they are paid to the
retirees. The supplemental rate charged under this section to fund automatic
postretirement adjustments for active or retired members of the public
employees' retirement system plan 1 and the teachers' retirement system plan 1
shall be calculated as the level percentage of pay needed to fund the cost of
the automatic adjustments not later than June 30, 2024.

(6) A supplemental rate
shall not be charged to pay for the cost of additional benefits granted to
members pursuant to chapter 340, Laws of 1998.

(7) A supplemental rate
shall not be charged to pay for the cost of additional benefits granted to
members pursuant to chapter 41.31A RCW; section 309, chapter 341, Laws of 1998;
or section 701, chapter 341, Laws of 1998.

Sec. 17. RCW 41.45.080 and 1989 c
273 s 8 are each amended to read as follows:

In addition to the
basic and supplemental employer contributions required by RCW 41.45.060,
section 9 of this act, and 41.45.070, the department may also
require additional employer contributions as provided by law.

Sec. 18. RCW 41.45.120 and 1998 c
283 s 4 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) ((A pension
funding work group is hereby created. The work group shall consist of one
staff member selected by the executive head or chairperson of each of the
following agencies or committees:

(a) Department of
retirement systems;

(b) Office of
financial management;

(c) State investment
board;

(d) Ways and means
committee of the senate;

(e) Appropriations
committee of the house of representatives; and

(f)
Economic and revenue forecast council.

(2) The state
actuary shall make available to the work group information related to economic
assumptions and contribution rates.

(3))) The ((pension funding work group)) office
of the state actuary shall provide staff support to the pension
funding council((. Meetings of the pension funding work group may be called
by any member of the group for the purpose of assisting the pension funding
council, reviewing actuarial valuations of the state retirement systems,
reviewing economic assumptions, or for any other purpose which may assist the
pension funding council)). The council may also retain independent
actuarial advice, to be retained with the assistance of the department, and
paid by the department from the fund established in RCW 41.50.110.

(((4))) (2)
Recommendations from both affected employee and employer groups will be
actively sought during the ((work group)) council review process.
The ((work group)) council shall conduct an open public meeting
on ((these recommendations)) any proposed changes to contribution
rates or long-term economic assumptions.

Sec. 19. RCW 41.45.100 and 1998 c
283 s 2 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) The pension funding
council is hereby created. The council consists of the:

(a) Director of the
department of retirement systems;

(b)
Director of the office of financial management;

(c) Chair and ranking
minority member of the house of representatives appropriations committee; and

(d) Chair and ranking
minority member of the senate ways and means committee.

The council may select
officers as the members deem necessary.

(2) The pension funding
council shall adopt changes to economic assumptions and contribution rates by
an affirmative vote of at least four members.

(3) Regular meetings
of the pension funding council are subject to the provisions of chapter 42.30
RCW.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
20. If any provision of this
act or its application to any person or circumstance is held invalid, the
remainder of the act or the application of the provision to other persons or
circumstances is not affected.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
21. Sections 1, 3, and 7 of
this act expire March 1, 2002.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
22. Sections 2, 4, 8, 13, 14,
and 16 of this act take effect March 1, 2002.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 23. Except for the sections
listed in section 22 of this act, this act is necessary for the immediate
preservation of the public peace, health, or safety, or support of the state
government and its existing public institutions, and takes effect July 1, 2001.

---
END ---