BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF
WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec.
1. A new section is added
to chapter 41.05 RCW to read as follows:

(1) Except as provided
in subsection (4) of this section, any policy that is delivered, issued for
delivery, renewed, extended, or modified in this state by an insuring entity
must provide that the health insurance benefits applicable under the health insurance
policy must include coverage for initial screening and for any necessary
audiologic diagnostic follow-up care related to the newborn hearing screening
test.

(2) Except as provided
in subsection (4) of this section, if a health insurance policy provides
coverage or benefits to a resident of this state, it shall be deemed to be
delivered in this state within the meaning of this chapter regardless of
whether the insuring entity issuing or delivering the policy is located within
or outside this state.

(3) Benefits for the
newborn child hearing screening test and any necessary audiologic follow-up
care are subject to copayment and coinsurance provisions of a health insurance
policy to the extent that other medical services covered by the policy are subject
to those provisions, except that benefits for the newborn child hearing
screening test are exempt from deductible or dollar limit provisions in the
health insurance policy. This exemption must be explicitly provided for in the
policy.

(4) Notwithstanding
subsections (1) and (2) of this section, this section shall not be construed to
require a health insurance policy to include coverage for the newborn child
hearing screening test for an individual who is a resident of this state if the
individual is employed outside this state and the individual's employer
maintains a health insurance policy for the individual as an employment
benefit.

(5) This section
applies to all policies issued under this chapter and delivered or issued for
delivery on or after the effective date of this section. This section also
applies to all renewals of contracts that are renewed on or after the effective
date of this section.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
2. A new section is added
to chapter 48.21 RCW to read as follows:

(1) Except as provided
in subsection (4) of this section, any policy that is delivered, issued for
delivery, renewed, extended, or modified in this state by an insurer must
provide that the health insurance benefits applicable under the health
insurance policy must include coverage for initial screening and for any
necessary audiologic diagnostic follow-up care related to the newborn hearing
screening test.

(2) Except as provided
in subsection (4) of this section, if a health insurance policy provides
coverage or benefits to a resident of this state, it shall be deemed to be
delivered in this state within the meaning of this chapter regardless of
whether the insurer issuing or delivering the policy is located within or
outside this state.

(3) Benefits for the
newborn child hearing screening test and any necessary audiologic follow-up
care are subject to copayment and coinsurance provisions of a health insurance
policy to the extent that other medical services covered by the policy are
subject to those provisions, except that benefits for the newborn child hearing
screening test are exempt from deductible or dollar limit provisions in the
health insurance policy. This exemption must be explicitly provided for in the
policy.

(4) Notwithstanding
subsections (1) and (2) of this section, this section shall not be construed to
require a health insurance policy to include coverage for the newborn child
hearing screening test for an individual who is a resident of this state if the
individual is employed outside this state and the individual's employer
maintains a health insurance policy for the individual as an employment
benefit.

(5) This section
applies to all policies issued under this chapter and delivered or issued for
delivery on or after the effective date of this section. This section also
applies to all renewals of contracts that are renewed on or after the effective
date of this section.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
3. A new section is added
to chapter 48.44 RCW to read as follows:

(1) Except as provided
in subsection (4) of this section, any health insurance contract that is
delivered, issued for delivery, renewed, extended, or modified in this state by
any carrier must provide that the health insurance benefits applicable under
the health insurance contract must include coverage for initial screening and
for any necessary audiologic diagnostic follow-up care related to the newborn
hearing screening test.

(2) Except as provided
in subsection (4) of this section, if a health insurance contract provides
coverage or benefits to a resident of this state, it shall be deemed to be
delivered in this state within the meaning of this chapter regardless of
whether the health carrier issuing or delivering the policy is located within
or outside this state.

(3) Benefits for the
newborn child hearing screening test and any necessary audiologic follow-up
care are subject to copayment and coinsurance provisions of a health insurance
contract to the extent that other medical services covered by the contract are
subject to those provisions, except that benefits for the newborn child hearing
screening test are exempt from deductible or dollar limit provisions in the
health insurance contract. This exemption must be explicitly provided for in
the contract.

(4) Notwithstanding
subsections (1) and (2) of this section, this section shall not be construed to
require a health insurance contract to include coverage for the newborn child
hearing screening test for an individual who is a resident of this state if the
individual is employed outside this state and the individual's employer
maintains a health insurance contract for the individual as an employment
benefit.

(5) This section
applies to all contracts issued under any group master policy, delivered or
issued for delivery on or after the effective date of this section. This
section also applies to all renewals of contracts that are renewed on or after
the effective date of this section.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
4. A new section is added
to chapter 48.46 RCW to read as follows:

(1) Except as provided
in subsection (4) of this section, a health maintenance organization must
include coverage for initial screening and for any necessary audiologic
diagnostic follow-up care related to the newborn hearing screening test.

(2) Except as provided
in subsection (4) of this section, if a health maintenance organization
provides coverage or benefits to a resident of this state, it shall be deemed
to be delivered in this state within the meaning of this chapter regardless of
whether the health maintenance organization is located within or outside this
state.

(3) Benefits for the
newborn child hearing screening test and any necessary audiologic follow-up
care are subject to copayment and coinsurance provisions of a health
maintenance agreement to the extent that other medical services covered by the
health maintenance agreement are subject to those provisions, except that
benefits for the newborn child hearing screening test are exempt from
deductible or dollar limit provisions in the health maintenance agreement.
This exemption must be explicitly provided for in the health maintenance
agreement.

(4) Notwithstanding
subsections (1) and (2) of this section, this section shall not be construed to
require a health maintenance agreement to include coverage for the newborn
child hearing screening test for an individual who is a resident of this state
if the individual is employed outside this state and the individual's employer
maintains a health insurance policy for the individual as an employment
benefit.

(5) This section
applies to all health maintenance agreements delivered or issued for delivery
on or after the effective date of this section. This section also applies to
all renewals of health maintenance agreements that are renewed on or after the
effective date of this section.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
5. A new section is added
to chapter 74.09 RCW to read as follows:

(1) The department must
pay for the newborn/infant child hearing screening test, if the child is
eligible for medical assistance as determined by state and federal law.

(2) The
governor must ensure that any contract for the provision of medical assistance
negotiated with a managed care organization as authorized by state law shall
include payment for newborn/infant hearing screening testing and necessary
audiologic follow-up care.

---
END ---