BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF
WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec.
1. INTENT. The legislature
recognizes that a multimodal approach to the state's transportation system is
the best means of addressing transportation needs. For the past decade, little
money has been spent on adding capacity to our state's urban area
transportation systems. This lack of investment includes major new highway
projects to add capacity and lane miles to major state routes, interstates or
other freeway systems, and local principal arterials, and other means to reduce
traffic congestion including capacity improvements for public transportation
and high-capacity transportation systems.

To further encourage a
comprehensive multimodal transportation system that provides efficient mobility
choices for persons and freight requires a partnership between the state,
local, and regional governments and the private sector. To this end, the
legislature desires to empower local regions to accomplish transportation
projects by enabling them to raise revenue and choose projects locally and to
provide state resources to help fund certain of these projects.

The legislature further
finds that many transportation decisions are best made at the regional level,
where transportation problems are best understood. To achieve improved
regional mobility, promote individual and economic well-being, and to implement
recommendation number six of the Blue Ribbon Commission on Transportation final
report, relating to regional transportation solutions, congestion relief boards
are created. The legislature declares that it is the public policy of this
state to encourage and facilitate transportation improvements, including making
optimum use of existing facilities. It is the purpose of congestion relief
boards to select projects, oversee their implementation, generate revenues for
a limited period of time, assist in the financing of transportation
improvements, and improve transportation mobility in congested areas.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
2. DEFINITIONS. The
definitions in this section apply throughout this chapter unless the context
clearly requires otherwise.

(1) "Board"
means the governing body of a regional congestion relief district.

(2) "Congestion
relief plan" or "plan" means a document that sets forth projects
that meet funding qualification requirements and that provides for financing
the projects, including proposed taxes.

(3) "Funding
qualifications" means designation as congestion relief projects by the
board and inclusion in the transportation plan of the state, a regional
transportation planning organization, or a metropolitan planning organization.

(4) "Project
sponsor" means a public agency that by law can plan, design, and build a
project and may include the state department of transportation, a county, a
city, a transit agency, a regional transit authority, or a port district.

(5) "Regional
congestion relief district" or "district" means a
quasi-municipal corporation created under this chapter.

(6)
"Transportation improvement project" or "project" means an
improvement that adds a lane or lanes to a principal local arterial or state
route including the interstate system, creates a new state route or federal interstate
route, optimizes the use or productivity of an existing principal arterial or
state highway, or adds capacity to public transportation or high-capacity
transportation services along transportation corridors, including ferry
services.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
3. DISTRICT FORMATION. The
legislative authority of a county, except for those counties identified in
section 4 of this act, may form a congestion relief district. The mayor of the
largest city in the county, the secretary of transportation, and the county
legislative authority, acting ex officio and independently, are the governing
board for the district. Major actions of the board, as defined in section 4 of
this act, require a majority plus one vote of the board members voting in the
affirmative. For a project that involves state participation in funding, the
secretary of transportation must vote in the affirmative. If the board
approves formation of the district, the board has the following duties and
powers:

(1) To set the
boundaries of the proposed district that reasonably incorporate areas benefited
by the projects proposed in the plan;

(2) To appoint advisors
and conduct public meetings that are needed to assure active public
participation in the development of the plan;

(3) To adopt a plan
that includes projects that meet funding qualifications and provides for the
financing for those projects. The plan must provide that at least one-third of
the expenditures on all projects address transportation demand management,
public transportation, high-capacity transit, and other alternatives to the
single-occupant vehicle;

(4) To forward the
proposed plan to the cities within the district. The plan will be placed on
the ballot unless fifty percent of the cities within the district representing
a minimum of fifty percent of the cities' and towns' population, by action of
the cities' and towns' legislative authorities, disapprove the plan within
thirty calendar days;

(5) To submit a plan to
a general election ballot for approval or rejection of the voters. If the
board submits a plan to a general election, it shall draft a ballot title, give
notices as required by law for ballot measures, and perform such other duties
as may be required to put the plan before the voters of the proposed district.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
4. DISTRICT FORMATION‑-CENTRAL
PUGET SOUND. (1) Counties that have areas included in a regional
transportation authority, together with a county having a population in excess
of two hundred thousand persons and that does not have within its borders an
interstate highway, may jointly form a congestion relief district by resolution
of each county's legislative authority. At least two adjoining counties must
agree for this district to be formed. The county executive of each county is
the governing board for this district, and if a member county does not have an
elected county executive, the chair of the county's legislative authority, plus
the secretary of the state department of transportation shall serve as the
board. The vote of each elected member of the board must be weighted in
proportion to the population of the member's county. Major actions of the
board require a two-thirds majority of the weighted votes on the board, and if
the district includes four counties, a majority plus one vote of the board
members voting in the affirmative are required. For a project that involves
state participation in funding, the secretary of transportation must vote in
the affirmative.

(2) Major actions of
the board include at least the following: Adoption of the boundaries of the
district; adoption of a plan identifying transportation improvement projects
that meet funding qualifications and the financing plan for those projects;
placing the plan and tax proposal on the ballot; and after voter approval, an
increase in a total project cost of more than twenty percent.

(3) The board for this
district has the same duties and powers as prescribed in section 3 of this
act. The plan will be placed on the ballot unless fifty percent of the cities
within the district representing a minimum of fifty percent of the cities' and
towns' population, by action of the cities' and towns' legislative authorities,
disapprove the plan within thirty calendar days. If the plan involves more
than one county, the county legislative body of each county shall vote as to
whether that county is to be included in the district, and the electorate will
be the voters in the area of each of the counties voting to form a single
district.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
5. CERTIFICATION OF
FORMATION. If the voters approve the plan and taxes, the district will be
declared formed. The county election official of a county, or if the district
is composed of more than a single county, county election officials jointly,
shall, within fifteen days of the final certification of the election results,
publish a notice in a newspaper or newspapers of general circulation in the
district declaring the district formed, and shall mail copies of the notice to
the governor, secretary of transportation, and the treasurer of the county or,
if the district is multicounty, the treasurer of the largest county, who shall
thereafter serve as the treasurer of the district. A party challenging the
formation of a voter-approved district must file his or her challenge in
writing by serving the prosecuting attorneys of each county within the district
and the attorney general within thirty days after the final certification of
the election. Failure to challenge within that time forever bars further
challenge of the district's valid formation.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
6. GOVERNING BOARD‑-ORGANIZATION,
POWERS, AND DUTIES. The governing board of the district is responsible for the
execution of the voter-approved plan. The board shall:

(1) Adopt bylaws to
govern its affairs, which may include:

(a) The time and place
of its regular meetings;

(b) Rules for calling
special meetings;

(c) The method of
keeping records of its proceedings and official acts;

(d) Titles of district
officers and terms and method of election;

(e) The requirements
for hiring employees and consultants;

(f) Procedures for the
safekeeping and disbursement of funds; and

(g) Any other
provisions the board finds necessary to include in the district bylaws;

(2) Provide for the
levying and collection of taxes authorized by the voters;

(3) Enter into agreements
with state, local, and regional agencies and departments as necessary to
accomplish district purposes and protect the district's investment in projects;

(4) Hire employees,
professional service providers, or contractors that are required for district purposes.
However, it is the intent of the legislature that projects be contracted with
the project sponsors;

(5) Accept gifts,
grants, or other contributions of funds that will support the purposes and
programs of the district;

(6) Monitor and audit
the progress and execution of projects to protect the investment of the public
and annually make public its findings;

(7) Evaluate
periodically whether it is desirable to place on a ballot for voter approval a
new or revised plan with additional projects and taxes; and

(8) Exercise such other
powers and duties as may be reasonably related to carrying out the mission of
the district.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
7. PERFORMANCE CRITERIA FOR
REGIONAL PROJECT SELECTION. The district shall consider the following criteria
for selecting projects to improve corridor performance:

(1) Reduced level of
congestion;

(2) Improved travel
time;

(3) Improved air
quality;

(4) Increases in daily
and peak period person and vehicle trip capacity;

(5) Reductions in
person and vehicle delay;

(6) Improved freight
mobility; and

(7) Cost-effectiveness
of the investment.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
8. PROJECT IMPLEMENTATION.
(1) The plan submitted to the voters must provide funding estimates for each
priority project. The plan may also list additional projects that may be
funded if the district has a surplus because a priority project is abandoned or
curtailed by the project sponsor, or surplus revenues become available for any
other reason. Plans submitted to the voters must provide that ninety-five
percent of all funds raised will fund projects in the plan including
environmental improvements and mitigation. Not more than five percent of funds
authorized by the plan may be used for the administrative costs of the
district.

(2) After voter
approval of the plan, the district shall accomplish its purposes by entering
into agreements with project sponsors as to who will acquire, construct, or
develop projects approved by the voters. The district shall negotiate
reasonable terms and conditions to assist project sponsors in funding
projects. The overall plan of the district must leverage the district's
financial contributions.

(3) The board may
periodically amend particular projects as warranted. However, increases in the
cost of a project exceeding twenty percent are considered major actions of the
board.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
9. TAXES AND FEES. (1) A
district may impose and collect the following local option taxes and fees
within its geographic boundaries:

(a) A local option
regional surcharge on transactions involving motor vehicles and related parts
and accessories, to be administered as follows:

(i) For transactions
involving motor vehicles, a sales and use tax not to exceed five-tenths of one
percent of the selling price shall be imposed on any person selling motor
vehicles (in the case of a sales tax) or value of the article used (in the case
of a use tax). The tax authorized under this section is in addition to the tax
authorized by RCW 82.14.030 and must be collected from those persons who are
taxable by the state under chapters 82.08 and 82.12 RCW upon the occurrence of
a taxable event within the taxing district;

(ii) For transactions
involving motor vehicle parts and accessories, an additional tax is imposed
upon any person selling motor vehicle parts and accessories at wholesale; as to
such persons, the amount of the additional tax with respect to such business is
equal to the gross proceeds of sales of the business, multiplied by the rate of
five-tenths of one percent.

(iii) "Motor
vehicle" has the same meaning as in RCW 46.04.320. "Motor vehicle
parts and accessories" means items of tangible personal property that
become a component part affixed to motor vehicles.

(b) A local option
vehicle license fee for each vehicle registered in the district, except
commercial vehicles as defined in RCW 46.04.140, per year on motor vehicles and
trailers or trailing units. The department of licensing shall administer and
collect this fee on behalf of a district and remit this fee to the custody of
the state treasurer, who shall distribute it as directed by a district;

(c) A local option
motor vehicle fuel tax on each gallon of motor vehicle fuel as defined in RCW
82.36.010 sold in the district and on each gallon of special fuel as defined in
RCW 82.38.020 sold in the district;

(d) A local option
commercial vehicle fee for each commercial vehicle as defined in RCW 46.04.140
registered in the district. The department of licensing shall administer and
collect this fee on behalf of a district and remit this fee to the custody of
the state treasurer, who shall distribute it as directed by a district;

(e) User fees on
projects improved under this chapter;

(f) An additional sales
and use tax upon sales of motor vehicle fuel and special fuel. The rate of tax
will be a percentage of the selling price in the case of a sales tax or value
of fuel used in the case of a use tax. "Motor vehicle fuel" and
"special fuel" have the same meaning as provided in RCW 82.36.010 and
82.38.020;

(g) A charge based upon
the miles traveled by a vehicle registered in the district.

(2) Taxes may not be
imposed without an affirmative vote of the voters within the boundaries of the
district on a referendum as set forth in section 3 of this act. Money
collected under this section must be used only to implement the district plan
in accordance with section 8 of this act. A district may contract with the
state department of revenue or other appropriate entities for administration
and collection of any of the taxes or fees authorized in this section.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
10. SUPPORT OF PROJECT
SPONSORS' DEBT. The district may not issue debt of its own for more than two
years' duration. A district may, when authorized by the plan, enter into
agreements with project sponsors to pledge taxes or other revenues of the
district for the purpose of paying in part or whole principal and interest on
bonds issued by the project sponsor. The contracts pledging revenues and taxes
must be binding for the term of the agreement, but not to exceed twenty-five
years, and no tax pledged by an agreement may be eliminated or modified if it
would impair the pledge of the agreement.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
11. DISTRICT DISSOLUTION. A
district once formed shall continue so long as projects or plans are being
actively developed or taxes levied to meet continuing district obligations.
When a district established under section 4 of this act is no longer engaged in
a project's development or levying taxes to fund projects, the board shall
submit to the county legislative bodies of the district a resolution of
dissolution. For a district established under section 3 of this act, the
county legislative authority may initiate a resolution of dissolution. The
resolution must be published in newspapers of general circulation within the
district at least three times in a period of thirty days. Creditors must file
claims for payment of claims due within thirty days of the last published
notice or the claim is extinguished. The district treasurer shall within
ninety days of the last published notice forward remaining funds in the
accounts of the district to the motor vehicle fund to be used to fund state
transportation projects within the former district boundaries.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
12. ACCOUNTABILITY. To
assure accountability to the public for the timely construction of the
transportation project or projects within cost projections, the district shall
issue an annual report to the public. In the report, the district shall
indicate the status of project costs, project expenditures, revenues,
construction schedules, and major changes by the board to the voter-approved
plan. The district shall issue additional reports as warranted to communicate
major changes in scope, cost, design, or other project issues.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
13. CAPTIONS. Section
captions used in this chapter are not part of the law.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
14. EMERGENCY CLAUSE. This
act is necessary for the immediate preservation of the public peace, health, or
safety, or support of the state government and its existing public
institutions, and takes effect immediately.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 15. CODIFICATION. Sections 1
through 14 of this act constitute a new chapter in Title 81 RCW.

---
END ---