BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF
THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1. RCW 47.01.290 and 1994 c
258 s 3 are each amended to read as follows:

The legislature
recognizes that environmental review of transportation projects is a continuous
process that should begin at the earliest stages of planning and continue
through final project construction. ((Early and extensive involvement of
the relevant environmental regulatory authorities is critical in order to avoid
significant changes in substantially completed project design and engineering.))
Streamlining the permit approval process is essential for reducing project
delays and for making the most efficient use of every transportation dollar.
It is the expectation of the legislature that if a comprehensive environmental
approach is integrated throughout various transportation processes, onerous,
duplicative, and time-consuming permit processes will be minimized. To this
end, the legislature directs that substantive standards and best management
practices governing the construction of transportation projects be jointly
agreed upon by both the department and Washington's natural resource agencies.
After these substantive standards have been agreed upon, the legislature finds
that the greatest efficiency and effectiveness in both protecting our
environmental resources and in constructing the transportation infrastructure
required to serve Washington's growing population will come from the
implementation of these standards by the department itself, with appropriate
oversight, as defined in this act, by both natural resource agencies and local
governments.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
2. DEFINITIONS. The
definitions in this section apply throughout this chapter unless the context
clearly requires otherwise.

(1) "Best
available information" means the existing sources of data, including
limiting factors analyses required under chapter 77.85 RCW, that can be used to
make informed decisions regarding environmental conditions within a watershed.

(2) "Best
management practices" means currently available and generally accepted
techniques, including new technologies or strategies that seek to reduce the
negative impacts of transportation facilities, projects, and services on
communities and the environment.

(3)
"Committee" means the transportation permit efficiency and
accountability committee created in section 3 of this act.

(4) "Least-cost
planning" means the use of best available information within a watershed
basin applied to transportation decision making in the planning, permitting,
and mitigation phases of a project.

(5) "Programmatic
permit" means a regulatory instrument that outlines permit conditions and
obligations for a variety of similar project activities spanning a watershed
ecosystem or geographically defined boundary, that once entered into by
parties, delineates an applicant's proposed actions over a specific period of time,
that may be conducted without the necessity of obtaining individual permits for
the types of projects identified.

(6)
"Transportation project of statewide significance" means a project or
combination of projects that crosses two or more city or county jurisdictional
boundaries.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
3. TRANSPORTATION PERMIT
EFFICIENCY AND ACCOUNTABILITY COMMITTEE‑-CREATED. The transportation
permit efficiency and accountability committee is created.

(1) The committee will
consist of seven voting members, including two members from the house of
representatives, one each selected by either each of the co-speakers or the
speaker and the minority leader of the house; two members of the senate, one
each selected by the senate majority leader and the senate minority leader; one
member designated by the secretary of transportation; one member designated by
the director of fish and wildlife; and one member designated by the director of
ecology. The committee shall elect a chair from the four legislators appointed
to the committee. The committee shall strive to work on a consensus basis;
however, decisions may be made by a simple majority of the committee.

(2) Representatives of
additional organizations or groups, including but not limited to the following
organizations and groups, may be invited by the committee to appear before the
committee and advise and provide input to the committee: The state
commissioner of public lands; the Northwest Indian Fisheries Commission; the
Columbia River Intertribal Fisheries Commission; the Association of Washington
Cities; the Washington State Association of Counties; the Consulting Engineers
Council of Washington; the Associated General Contractors of Washington; the
Washington Construction Industry Council; the Association of Washington
Business; the Building Industry Association of Washington; any statewide
environmental organization; the state fish and wildlife commission; the federal
Environmental Protection Agency; the National Marine Fisheries Service; the
Federal Highways Administration; and the United States Fish and Wildlife
Service.

(3) The committee may
create technical subcommittees to assist with drafting of and advice on
decisions to adopt the standards described in section 4(1)(a) of this act. In
order to use the broadest range of expertise available in writing the
substantive standards, the committee may appoint any individual or any
representative from any organization or agency as nonvoting members of these
technical subcommittees to assist in developing standards governing specific
topics.

(4) Legislative members
of the committee will be reimbursed for travel expenses as provided in RCW
44.04.120.

(5) The department of
transportation office of environmental affairs shall provide administrative and
clerical assistance to the committee.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
4. COMMITTEE‑‑RESPONSIBILITIES.
(1) Within twelve months of the effective date of this act, the committee
shall:

(a) Develop concise
environmental standards and best management practices for transportation
projects that can be applied with certainty, consistency, and assurance of
swift permit action, while taking into account the varying climate,
geomorphologic, and hydrologic conditions throughout the state. The standards
and best management practices must conform to all current relevant federal and
state environmental regulations, and must be sufficient to protect critical
areas as defined in chapter 36.70A RCW. Actions to achieve this goal must
include identification and development of standards to govern both programmatic
permits and individual project permits. Actions to achieve this goal may
include the adoption of existing environmental standards, such as existing storm
water manuals or other existing sources of standards and best management
practices, if the committee decides that these existing resources meet or
constitute state or federal environmental standards. These existing resources
may be incorporated by reference into the standards developed by the
committee. Nothing in this chapter may be interpreted as providing the
committee any authority to engage in rule making other than for the purpose of
drafting or adopting the standards specified in this subsection. Nothing in
this act may be interpreted as expanding the rule-making authority of any state
agency or as providing rule-making authority for any state agency, including
those agencies participating on the committee;

(b) Create a
streamlined consultation process for transportation projects for section 404
federal Clean Water Act and section 10 permits issued by the United States Army
Corps of Engineers;

(c) Develop a least‑cost
methodology for analyzing environmental impacts and applying compensatory mitigation
consistent with a watershed-based approach before final design;

(d) Assess models to
collate and access watershed data to support early agency involvement in
transportation planning and reviews under the federal Environmental Protection
Act and the State Environmental Protection Act;

(e) Develop procedures
to use existing best available information from a variety of sources including,
but not limited to, watershed planning efforts, lead entities, regional
fisheries enhancement groups, the salmon and steelhead inventory assessment
project (SSIAHP), and other recognized entities as deemed appropriate by the
committee, in order to determine potential mitigation site requirements for
project actions within a watershed. Priority consideration should be given to
the use of the state's alternative mitigation strategy to best link
transportation mitigation needs with local watershed and lead entity project
lists;

(f) Ensure that the
department seeks federal delegation authorities to the state where appropriate
to streamline permit processes including: Delegation of section 404 permit
authority under the federal Clean Water Act; nonfederal lead agency status
under the federal Endangered Species Act; section 106 cultural resource
designation under the National Historic Preservation Act; and other appropriate
authority that when delegated should result in permit streamlining.

(2) By January 1, 2002,
the committee shall issue an interim report to the legislature detailing its
progress toward drafting or adopting the standards as required by subsection
(1)(a) of this section. The committee may publicly issue this report by
posting it on the department of transportation's web site on the Internet pages
dedicated to the office of environmental affairs. The committee may transmit
this report to the legislature via electronic mail, and at a minimum shall
e-mail a copy of the report to every member of the house and senate
transportation committees, along with the co-speakers of the house and the
majority and minority leaders of the senate.

(3) Upon completion of
the drafting and adoption of the standards referred to in subsection (1)(a) of
this section, the committee shall suspend its operation until it is reconvened
to amend existing standards or draft or adopt additional standards as provided
by section 8(4) of this act, or until it is required to draft a remediation
plan as provided by section 8(3) of this act.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
5. (1) Upon completion of
the standard drafting or adoption process specified in section 4(1)(a) of this
act, the department of ecology and the department of fish and wildlife shall
delegate, to the maximum extent consistent with federal law, all environmental
permitting authority currently exercised by these agencies, including, but not
limited to, chapters 90.48, 90.58, and 77.55 RCW. The department of ecology
and the department of fish and wildlife shall delegate authority by certifying
the department to self-permit with regard to all state environmental permits
currently issued, approved, or consulted upon by the department of ecology and
the department of fish and wildlife.

(2) As part of the
department's self-permitting process, the department shall, before issuing the
final permit for a transportation project of statewide significance, send a
draft copy of the permit to both the department of ecology and the department
of fish and wildlife for review and comment. The departments of ecology and
fish and wildlife shall limit their comments to whether the department has
complied with the substantive standards and best management practices developed
under section 4(1)(a) of this act. The departments of ecology and fish and
wildlife have thirty days to review and comment on the draft permit.

(3) Upon completion of
the drafting or adoption process specified in section 4(1)(a) of this act, the
department shall review the department's construction project list to determine
which projects can be included in programmatic or general permits under the
standards adopted under section 4(1)(a) of this act. The department shall
maximize the use of the programmatic and general permits consistent with the
standards.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
6. (1) Upon the
certification or recertification provided for by section 5 or 8 of this act,
the department is exempt from obtaining any permit issued by a county, city, or
town, regarding a transportation project of statewide significance, including,
but not limited to, any permit issued under chapter 90.58 RCW, any permit
related to regulation of critical areas under chapter 36.70A RCW, and any
permit required for filling, grading, building, or construction, or any other
permit required for a transportation project of statewide significance, that
would otherwise be issued under a local ordinance meeting the definition of a
development regulation under chapter 35.63, 35A.63, 36.70, 36.70A, or 36.70B
RCW.

(2) For transportation
projects of statewide significance, the department shall serve as the lead
entity for all review required under the State Environmental Protection Act
(SEPA), chapter 43.21C RCW. Nothing in this section may be construed as
limiting the ability of local governments to participate in the SEPA process as
provided for in chapter 43.21C RCW.

(3) In addition to
local government participation in the SEPA process and as part of the
self-permitting process set forth in this chapter, the department shall, before
issuing the final permit for a transportation project of statewide
significance, send a draft copy of the permit to each local government in whose
jurisdiction the project is being constructed for review and comment. Each
local government will have thirty days to review and comment on the draft
permit.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
7. Every two years the
department shall send to the legislature, the governor, the department of
ecology, and the department of fish and wildlife a report detailing its
self-permitting activities over the previous two years. The report must
include a detailed description of all permits issued during the previous two
years and must include detailed analysis of all instances of noncompliance with
the standards developed under section 4(1)(a) of this act, as well as all
measures taken to prevent any future noncompliance.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
8. (1) Every seven years,
the department of fish and wildlife and the department of ecology shall jointly
conduct a review of the department's self-permitting practices over the
previous six years. The department of ecology and the department of fish and
wildlife shall submit a report on the performance of the department to the
legislature and the governor. The report must include a recommendation as to
whether the department should be decertified from self-permitting. The
department of ecology and the department of fish and wildlife may recommend
that the department be decertified from self-permitting only if they find that
the department has engaged in repeated substantial noncompliance with the
substantive standards developed and adopted under section 4(1)(a) of this act.
The department of ecology and the department of fish and wildlife shall
specifically identify all instances of substantial noncompliance, and shall
additionally identify measures that could be implemented to prevent the
substantial noncompliance in the future. For purposes of this section,
"repeated substantial noncompliance" means repeated failure to meet
the substantive standards and best management practices developed and adopted
under section 4(1)(a) of this act that causes more than de minimis actual harm
to fish and wildlife or their associated habitat.

(2) Upon a joint
finding by the department of ecology and the department of fish and wildlife
that the department has engaged in repeated substantial noncompliance with the
substantive standards developed under section 4(1)(a) of this act, the governor
may decertify the department from self-permitting. The notice of
decertification by the governor to the department must include written findings
that support the basis for decertification. Upon decertification, all
delegation of permitting authority from the departments of ecology and fish and
wildlife, and the department's exemption from the requirements to obtain local
permits as provided for in section 6(1) of this act, is suspended until the
committee has developed and imposed a remediation plan as governed by
subsection (3) of this section.

(3) Upon
decertification of the department by the governor under subsection (2) of this
section, the committee shall meet and develop a remediation plan to identify
and correct department procedures that were responsible for, or contributed to,
the department's substantial noncompliance with the standards. The department
shall implement the remediation plan developed by the committee. Upon full
implementation of the remediation plan, the department of ecology and the
department of fish and wildlife shall recertify the department to self-permit.

(4) Following the
seven-year review specified in subsection (1) of this section, the department
of ecology, the department of fish and wildlife, or the department of
transportation may reconvene the committee and propose amendments or additions
to the substantive standards adopted under section 4(1)(a) of this act. The
committee shall use the same process for amending standards or adopting
additional standards as were used to draft or adopt the initial standards as
specified in section 3 of this act.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
9. DEPARTMENT ORGANIZATION
AND ADMINISTRATIVE ACTIONS. The legislature finds that an essential component
of delegated federal or state permitting authority to the department is the
ability of the department to demonstrate the capacity to meet environmental
responsibilities. Therefore, the legislature directs that:

(1) Environmental staff
within the department shall lead the development of all environmental
documentation associated with department projects and permit activities in
accordance with the department's managing project delivery tools.

(2) Certified
environmental staff or certified consultants shall be given the responsibility
to draft environmental permits for the department.

(3) The department
shall conduct special prebid meetings for projects that are environmentally
complex. In addition, the department shall review environmental considerations
related to these projects during the preconstruction meeting held with the
contractor who is awarded the bid.

(4) Environmental staff
at the department shall conduct field inspections to ensure that project
activities are performed under permit conditions. These inspectors may issue
stop work orders when compliance with permit standards are not being met. For
this portion of their job duties, the inspectors are accountable to the
director of the office of environmental services of the department.

(5) Failure to comply
with a stop work order may result in civil penalties being assessed against the
department and individuals involved. Willful violation by an agency or
individual of a stop work notice issued by the department is subject to civil
penalties. Continued failure to comply or willful violations by the department
may result in loss of permit writing and program management responsibilities.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
10. TRAINING AND COMPLIANCE.
The legislature expects the department to continue its efforts to improve
training and compliance. The department shall:

(1) Provide training in
environmental procedures and permit requirements for those responsible for
project delivery activities;

(2) Provide resource
agency-approved certification training for permit writers and environmental
inspectors;

(3) Require wetland
mitigation sites to be designed by biologists or landscape architects certified
by the department of ecology's wetland program. Environmental mitigation site
improvements must have oversight conducted by environmental staff;

(4) Develop an
environmental compliance data system to track all permit conditions; and

(5) Keep detailed
records of all noncompliance activities.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
11. A new section is added
to chapter 77.55 RCW to read as follows:

Where the department of
fish and wildlife has delegated hydraulic project permit approval authority
contained in this chapter to the department of transportation under chapter
47.--- RCW (sections 2 through 10 of this act), the department of
transportation will be substituted for the department of fish and wildlife in
an appeal of the approval of a permit concerning a hydraulic project that is a
transportation project of statewide significance as defined in section 2 of
this act. The appeal process for the permits issued by the department of
transportation under authority delegated by the department of fish and wildlife
will operate in the same manner as for permits granted by the department of
fish and wildlife under this chapter.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
12. Section captions used in
this act are not part of the law.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 13. Sections 2 through 10 of
this act constitute a new chapter in Title 47 RCW.

---
END ---