BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF
WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1. RCW 74.46.020 and 1999 c
353 s 1 are each amended to read as follows:

Unless the context
clearly requires otherwise, the definitions in this section apply throughout
this chapter.

(1) "Accrual
method of accounting" means a method of accounting in which revenues are
reported in the period when they are earned, regardless of when they are
collected, and expenses are reported in the period in which they are incurred,
regardless of when they are paid.

(2)
"Appraisal" means the process of estimating the fair market value or
reconstructing the historical cost of an asset acquired in a past period as
performed by a professionally designated real estate appraiser with no
pecuniary interest in the property to be appraised. It includes a systematic,
analytic determination and the recording and analyzing of property facts,
rights, investments, and values based on a personal inspection and inventory of
the property.

(3) "Arm's-length
transaction" means a transaction resulting from good-faith bargaining
between a buyer and seller who are not related organizations and have adverse
positions in the market place. Sales or exchanges of nursing home facilities
among two or more parties in which all parties subsequently continue to own one
or more of the facilities involved in the transactions shall not be considered
as arm's-length transactions for purposes of this chapter. Sale of a nursing
home facility which is subsequently leased back to the seller within five years
of the date of sale shall not be considered as an arm's-length transaction for
purposes of this chapter.

(4) "Assets"
means economic resources of the contractor, recognized and measured in
conformity with generally accepted accounting principles.

(5) "Audit"
or "department audit" means an examination of the records of a
nursing facility participating in the medicaid payment system, including but
not limited to: The contractor's financial and statistical records, cost
reports and all supporting documentation and schedules, receivables, and
resident trust funds, to be performed as deemed necessary by the department and
according to department rule.

(6) "Bad
debts" means amounts considered to be uncollectible from accounts and
notes receivable.

(7) "Beneficial
owner" means:

(a) Any person who,
directly or indirectly, through any contract, arrangement, understanding,
relationship, or otherwise has or shares:

(i) Voting power which
includes the power to vote, or to direct the voting of such ownership interest;
and/or

(ii) Investment power
which includes the power to dispose, or to direct the disposition of such
ownership interest;

(b) Any person who, directly
or indirectly, creates or uses a trust, proxy, power of attorney, pooling
arrangement, or any other contract, arrangement, or device with the purpose or
effect of divesting himself or herself of beneficial ownership of an ownership
interest or preventing the vesting of such beneficial ownership as part of a
plan or scheme to evade the reporting requirements of this chapter;

(c) Any person who,
subject to (b) of this subsection, has the right to acquire beneficial
ownership of such ownership interest within sixty days, including but not
limited to any right to acquire:

(i) Through the
exercise of any option, warrant, or right;

(ii) Through the
conversion of an ownership interest;

(iii) Pursuant to the
power to revoke a trust, discretionary account, or similar arrangement; or

(iv) Pursuant to the
automatic termination of a trust, discretionary account, or similar
arrangement;

except that, any person who
acquires an ownership interest or power specified in (c)(i), (ii), or (iii) of
this subsection with the purpose or effect of changing or influencing the
control of the contractor, or in connection with or as a participant in any
transaction having such purpose or effect, immediately upon such acquisition
shall be deemed to be the beneficial owner of the ownership interest which may
be acquired through the exercise or conversion of such ownership interest or
power;

(d) Any person who in
the ordinary course of business is a pledgee of ownership interest under a
written pledge agreement shall not be deemed to be the beneficial owner of such
pledged ownership interest until the pledgee has taken all formal steps
necessary which are required to declare a default and determines that the power
to vote or to direct the vote or to dispose or to direct the disposition of
such pledged ownership interest will be exercised; except that:

(i) The pledgee
agreement is bona fide and was not entered into with the purpose nor with the
effect of changing or influencing the control of the contractor, nor in
connection with any transaction having such purpose or effect, including
persons meeting the conditions set forth in (b) of this subsection; and

(ii) The pledgee
agreement, prior to default, does not grant to the pledgee:

(A) The power to vote
or to direct the vote of the pledged ownership interest; or

(B) The power to
dispose or direct the disposition of the pledged ownership interest, other than
the grant of such power(s) pursuant to a pledge agreement under which credit is
extended and in which the pledgee is a broker or dealer.

(8) "Capital
portion of the rate" means the sum of the property and financing allowance
rate allocations, as established in part E of this chapter.

(9)
"Capitalization" means the recording of an expenditure as an asset.

(10) "Case
mix" means a measure of the intensity of care and services needed by the
residents of a nursing facility or a group of residents in the facility.

(11) "Case mix
index" means a number representing the average case mix of a nursing
facility.

(12) "Case mix
weight" means a numeric score that identifies the relative resources used
by a particular group of a nursing facility's residents.

(13) "Certificate
of capital authorization" means a certification from the department for an
allocation from the biennial capital financing authorization for all new or
replacement building construction, or for major renovation projects, receiving
a certificate of need or a certificate of need exemption under chapter 70.38
RCW after July 1, 2001.

(14)
"Contractor" means a person or entity licensed under chapter 18.51
RCW to operate a medicare and medicaid certified nursing facility, responsible
for operational decisions, and contracting with the department to provide
services to medicaid recipients residing in the facility.

(((14))) (15)
"Default case" means no initial assessment has been completed for a
resident and transmitted to the department by the cut‑off date, or an
assessment is otherwise past due for the resident, under state and federal
requirements.

(((15))) (16)
"Department" means the department of social and health services
(DSHS) and its employees.

(((16))) (17)
"Depreciation" means the systematic distribution of the cost or other
basis of tangible assets, less salvage, over the estimated useful life of the
assets.

(((17))) (18)
"Direct care" means nursing care and related care provided to nursing
facility residents. Therapy care shall not be considered part of direct care.

(((18))) (19)
"Direct care supplies" means medical, pharmaceutical, and other
supplies required for the direct care of a nursing facility's residents.

(((19))) (20)
"Entity" means an individual, partnership, corporation, limited
liability company, or any other association of individuals capable of entering
enforceable contracts.

(((20))) (21)
"Equity" means the net book value of all tangible and intangible
assets less the recorded value of all liabilities, as recognized and measured
in conformity with generally accepted accounting principles.

(((21))) (22)
"Facility" or "nursing facility" means a nursing home
licensed in accordance with chapter 18.51 RCW, excepting nursing homes
certified as institutions for mental diseases, or that portion of a
multiservice facility licensed as a nursing home, or that portion of a hospital
licensed in accordance with chapter 70.41 RCW which operates as a nursing home.

(((22))) (23)
"Fair market value" means the replacement cost of an asset less
observed physical depreciation on the date for which the market value is being
determined.

(((23))) (24)
"Financial statements" means statements prepared and presented in
conformity with generally accepted accounting principles including, but not
limited to, balance sheet, statement of operations, statement of changes in
financial position, and related notes.

(((24))) (25)
"Generally accepted accounting principles" means accounting
principles approved by the financial accounting standards board (FASB).

(((25))) (26)
"Goodwill" means the excess of the price paid for a nursing facility
business over the fair market value of all net identifiable tangible and
intangible assets acquired, as measured in accordance with generally accepted
accounting principles.

(((26))) (27)
"Grouper" means a computer software product that groups individual
nursing facility residents into case mix classification groups based on
specific resident assessment data and computer logic.

(((27))) (28)
"Historical cost" means the actual cost incurred in acquiring and
preparing an asset for use, including feasibility studies, architect's fees,
and engineering studies.

(((28))) (29)
"Home and central office costs" means costs that are incurred in the
support and operation of a home or central office. Home and central office
costs include centralized services that are done in support of a nursing
facility. The department may exclude costs that are nonduplicative,
documented, ordinary, necessary, and related to the provision of care services
to authorized patients.

(30)
"Imprest fund" means a fund which is regularly replenished in exactly
the amount expended from it.

(((29))) (31)
"Joint facility costs" means any costs which represent resources
which benefit more than one facility, or one facility and any other entity.

(((30))) (32)
"Lease agreement" means a contract between two parties for the
possession and use of real or personal property or assets for a specified
period of time in exchange for specified periodic payments. Elimination (due
to any cause other than death or divorce) or addition of any party to the
contract, expiration, or modification of any lease term in effect on January 1,
1980, or termination of the lease by either party by any means shall constitute
a termination of the lease agreement. An extension or renewal of a lease
agreement, whether or not pursuant to a renewal provision in the lease
agreement, shall be considered a new lease agreement. A strictly formal change
in the lease agreement which modifies the method, frequency, or manner in which
the lease payments are made, but does not increase the total lease payment
obligation of the lessee, shall not be considered modification of a lease term.

(((31))) (33)
"Medical care program" or "medicaid program" means medical
assistance, including nursing care, provided under RCW 74.09.500 or authorized
state medical care services.

(((32))) (34)
"Medical care recipient," "medicaid recipient," or
"recipient" means an individual determined eligible by the department
for the services provided under chapter 74.09 RCW.

(((33))) (35)
"Minimum data set" means the overall data component of the resident
assessment instrument, indicating the strengths, needs, and preferences of an
individual nursing facility resident.

(((34))) (36)
"Net book value" means the historical cost of an asset less
accumulated depreciation.

(((35))) (37)
"Net invested funds" means the net book value of tangible fixed
assets employed by a contractor to provide services under the medical care
program, including land, buildings, and equipment as recognized and measured in
conformity with generally accepted accounting principles.

(((36))) (38)
"Noncapital portion of the rate" means the sum of the direct care,
therapy care, operations, support services, and variable return rate
allocations, as established in part E of this chapter.

(((37))) (39)
"Operating lease" means a lease under which rental or lease expenses
are included in current expenses in accordance with generally accepted
accounting principles.

(((38))) (40)
"Owner" means a sole proprietor, general or limited partners, members
of a limited liability company, and beneficial interest holders of five percent
or more of a corporation's outstanding stock.

(((39))) (41)
"Ownership interest" means all interests beneficially owned by a
person, calculated in the aggregate, regardless of the form which such
beneficial ownership takes.

(((40))) (42)
"Patient day" or "resident day" means a calendar day of
care provided to a nursing facility resident, regardless of payment source,
which will include the day of admission and exclude the day of discharge;
except that, when admission and discharge occur on the same day, one day of
care shall be deemed to exist. A "medicaid day" or "recipient
day" means a calendar day of care provided to a medicaid recipient
determined eligible by the department for services provided under chapter 74.09
RCW, subject to the same conditions regarding admission and discharge
applicable to a patient day or resident day of care.

(((41))) (43)
"Professionally designated real estate appraiser" means an individual
who is regularly engaged in the business of providing real estate valuation
services for a fee, and who is deemed qualified by a nationally recognized real
estate appraisal educational organization on the basis of extensive practical
appraisal experience, including the writing of real estate valuation reports as
well as the passing of written examinations on valuation practice and theory,
and who by virtue of membership in such organization is required to subscribe
and adhere to certain standards of professional practice as such organization
prescribes.

(((42))) (44)
"Qualified therapist" means:

(a) A mental health
professional as defined by chapter 71.05 RCW;

(b) A mental
retardation professional who is a therapist approved by the department who has
had specialized training or one year's experience in treating or working with
the mentally retarded or developmentally disabled;

(c) A speech
pathologist who is eligible for a certificate of clinical competence in speech
pathology or who has the equivalent education and clinical experience;

(d) A physical
therapist as defined by chapter 18.74 RCW;

(e) An occupational
therapist who is a graduate of a program in occupational therapy, or who has the
equivalent of such education or training; and

(f) A respiratory care
practitioner certified under chapter 18.89 RCW.

(((43))) (45)
"Rate" or "rate allocation" means the medicaid
per-patient-day payment amount for medicaid patients calculated in accordance
with the allocation methodology set forth in part E of this chapter.

(((44))) (46)
"Real property," whether leased or owned by the contractor, means the
building, allowable land, land improvements, and building improvements
associated with a nursing facility.

(((45))) (47)
"Rebased rate" or "cost-rebased rate" means a
facility-specific component rate assigned to a nursing facility for a
particular rate period established on desk-reviewed, adjusted costs reported
for that facility covering at least six months of a prior calendar year
designated as a year to be used for cost-rebasing payment rate allocations
under the provisions of this chapter.

(((46))) (48)
"Records" means those data supporting all financial statements and
cost reports including, but not limited to, all general and subsidiary ledgers,
books of original entry, and transaction documentation, however such data are
maintained.

(((47))) (49)
"Related organization" means an entity which is under common
ownership and/or control with, or has control of, or is controlled by, the
contractor.

(a) "Common
ownership" exists when an entity is the beneficial owner of five percent
or more ownership interest in the contractor and any other entity.

(b) "Control"
exists where an entity has the power, directly or indirectly, significantly to
influence or direct the actions or policies of an organization or institution,
whether or not it is legally enforceable and however it is exercisable or
exercised.

(((48))) (50)
"Related care" means only those services that are directly related to
providing direct care to nursing facility residents. These services include,
but are not limited to, nursing direction and supervision, medical direction,
medical records, pharmacy services, activities, and social services.

(((49))) (51)
"Resident assessment instrument," including federally approved
modifications for use in this state, means a federally mandated, comprehensive
nursing facility resident care planning and assessment tool, consisting of the
minimum data set and resident assessment protocols.

(((50))) (52)
"Resident assessment protocols" means those components of the
resident assessment instrument that use the minimum data set to trigger or flag
a resident's potential problems and risk areas.

(((51))) (53)
"Resource utilization groups" means a case mix classification system
that identifies relative resources needed to care for an individual nursing
facility resident.

(((52))) (54)
"Restricted fund" means those funds the principal and/or income of
which is limited by agreement with or direction of the donor to a specific
purpose.

(((53))) (55)
"Secretary" means the secretary of the department of social and
health services.

(((54))) (56)
"Support services" means food, food preparation, dietary,
housekeeping, and laundry services provided to nursing facility residents.

(((55))) (57)
"Therapy care" means those services required by a nursing facility
resident's comprehensive assessment and plan of care, that are provided by qualified
therapists, or support personnel under their supervision, including related
costs as designated by the department.

(((56))) (58)
"Title XIX" or "medicaid" means the 1965 amendments to the
social security act, P.L. 89‑07, as amended and the medicaid program
administered by the department.

Sec. 2. RCW 74.46.165 and 1998 c
322 s 10 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) Contractors shall
be required to submit with each annual nursing facility cost report a proposed
settlement report showing underspending or overspending in each component rate
during the cost report year on a per-resident day basis. The department shall
accept or reject the proposed settlement report, explain any adjustments, and
issue a revised settlement report if needed.

(2) Contractors shall
not be required to refund payments made in the operations, variable return,
property, and ((return on investment)) financing allowance
component rates in excess of the adjusted costs of providing services corresponding
to these components.

(3) The facility will
return to the department any overpayment amounts in each of the direct care,
therapy care, and support services rate components that the department
identifies following the audit and settlement procedures as described in this
chapter, provided that the contractor may retain any overpayment that does not
exceed 1.0% of the facility's direct care, therapy care, and support services
component rate. However, no overpayments may be retained in a cost center to
which savings have been shifted to cover a deficit, as provided in subsection
(4) of this section. Facilities that are not in substantial compliance for
more than ninety days, and facilities that provide substandard quality of care
at any time, during the period for which settlement is being calculated, will
not be allowed to retain any amount of overpayment in the facility's direct
care, therapy care, and support services component rate. The terms "not
in substantial compliance" and "substandard quality of care"
shall be defined by federal survey regulations.

(4) Determination of
unused rate funds, including the amounts of direct care, therapy care, and
support services to be recovered, shall be done separately for each component
rate, and, except as otherwise provided in this subsection, neither
costs nor rate payments shall be shifted from one component rate or
corresponding service area to another in determining the degree of
underspending or recovery, if any. ((However,)) In computing a
preliminary or final settlement, savings in the support services cost center ((may))
shall be shifted to cover a deficit in the direct care or therapy cost
centers up to the amount of any savings((. Not more than twenty percent of
the rate in a cost center may be shifted)), but no more than twenty
percent of the support services component rate may be shifted. In computing a
preliminary or final settlement, savings in direct care and therapy care may be
shifted to cover a deficit in these two cost centers up to the amount of
savings in each, regardless of the percentage of either component rate
shifted. Contractor-retained overpayments up to one percent of direct care,
therapy care, and support services rate components, as authorized in subsection
(3) of this section, shall be calculated and applied after all shifting is
completed.

(5) Total and component
payment rates assigned to a nursing facility, as calculated and revised, if
needed, under the provisions of this chapter and those rules as the department
may adopt, shall represent the maximum payment for nursing facility services
rendered to medicaid recipients for the period the rates are in effect. No
increase in payment to a contractor shall result from spending above the total
payment rate or in any rate component.

(6) RCW 74.46.150
through 74.46.180, and rules adopted by the department prior to July 1, 1998,
shall continue to govern the medicaid settlement process for periods prior to
October 1, 1998, as if these statutes and rules remained in full force and effect.

(7) For calendar year
1998, the department shall calculate split settlements covering January 1,
1998, through September 30, 1998, and October 1, 1998, through December 31,
1998. For the period beginning October 1, 1998, rules specified in this chapter
shall apply. The department shall, by rule, determine the division of calendar
year 1998 adjusted costs for settlement purposes.

Sec. 3. RCW 74.46.410 and 1998 c
322 s 17 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) Costs will be
unallowable if they are not documented, necessary, ordinary, and related to the
provision of care services to authorized patients.

(2) Unallowable costs
include, but are not limited to, the following:

(a) Costs of items or
services not covered by the medical care program. Costs of such items or
services will be unallowable even if they are indirectly reimbursed by the
department as the result of an authorized reduction in patient contribution;

(b) Costs of services
and items provided to recipients which are covered by the department's medical
care program but not included in the medicaid per-resident day payment rate
established by the department under this chapter;

(c) Costs associated
with a capital expenditure subject to section 1122 approval (part 100, Title 42
C.F.R.) if the department found it was not consistent with applicable
standards, criteria, or plans. If the department was not given timely notice
of a proposed capital expenditure, all associated costs will be unallowable up
to the date they are determined to be reimbursable under applicable federal
regulations;

(d) Costs associated
with a construction or acquisition project requiring certificate of need
approval, or exemption from the requirements for certificate of need for the
replacement of existing nursing home beds, pursuant to chapter 70.38 RCW if
such approval or exemption was not obtained;

(e) Interest costs
other than those provided by RCW 74.46.290 on and after January 1, 1985;

(f) Salaries or other
compensation of owners, officers, directors, stockholders, partners,
principals, participants, and others associated with the contractor or its home
office, including all board of directors' fees for any purpose, except
reasonable compensation paid for service related to patient care;

(g) Costs in excess of
limits or in violation of principles set forth in this chapter;

(h) Costs resulting
from transactions or the application of accounting methods which circumvent the
principles of the payment system set forth in this chapter;

(i) Costs applicable to
services, facilities, and supplies furnished by a related organization in
excess of the lower of the cost to the related organization or the price of
comparable services, facilities, or supplies purchased elsewhere;

(j) Bad debts of
non-Title XIX recipients. Bad debts of Title XIX recipients are allowable if
the debt is related to covered services, it arises from the recipient's
required contribution toward the cost of care, the provider can establish that
reasonable collection efforts were made, the debt was actually uncollectible
when claimed as worthless, and sound business judgment established that there
was no likelihood of recovery at any time in the future;

(k) Charity and
courtesy allowances;

(l) Cash, assessments,
or other contributions, excluding dues, to charitable organizations,
professional organizations, trade associations, or political parties, and costs
incurred to improve community or public relations;

(m) Vending machine
expenses;

(n) Expenses for barber
or beautician services not included in routine care;

(o) Funeral and burial
expenses;

(p) Costs of gift shop
operations and inventory;

(q) Personal items such
as cosmetics, smoking materials, newspapers and magazines, and clothing, except
those used in patient activity programs;

(r) Fund-raising
expenses, except those directly related to the patient activity program;

(s) Penalties and
fines;

(t) Expenses related to
telephones, ((televisions,)) radios, and similar appliances in patients'
private accommodations;

(u) Televisions
acquired prior to July 1, 2001;

(v) Federal,
state, and other income taxes;

(((v))) (w)
Costs of special care services except where authorized by the department;

(((w))) (x)
Expenses of an employee benefit not in fact made available to all employees on
an equal or fair basis, for example, key-man insurance and other insurance or
retirement plans;

(((x))) (y)
Expenses of profit-sharing plans;

(((y))) (z)
Expenses related to the purchase and/or use of private or commercial airplanes
which are in excess of what a prudent contractor would expend for the ordinary
and economic provision of such a transportation need related to patient care;

(((z))) (aa)
Personal expenses and allowances of owners or relatives;

(((aa))) (bb)
All expenses of maintaining professional licenses or membership in professional
organizations;

(((bb))) (cc)
Costs related to agreements not to compete;

(((cc))) (dd)
Amortization of goodwill, lease acquisition, or any other intangible asset,
whether related to resident care or not, and whether recognized under generally
accepted accounting principles or not;

(((dd))) (ee)
Expenses related to vehicles which are in excess of what a prudent contractor
would expend for the ordinary and economic provision of transportation needs
related to patient care;

(((ee))) (ff)
Legal and consultant fees in connection with a fair hearing against the
department where a decision is rendered in favor of the department or where
otherwise the determination of the department stands;

(((ff))) (gg)
Legal and consultant fees of a contractor or contractors in connection with a
lawsuit against the department;

(((gg))) (hh)
Lease acquisition costs, goodwill, the cost of bed rights, or any other
intangible assets;

(((hh))) (ii)
All rental or lease costs other than those provided in RCW 74.46.300 on and
after January 1, 1985;

(((ii))) (jj)
Postsurvey charges incurred by the facility as a result of subsequent inspections
under RCW 18.51.050 which occur beyond the first postsurvey visit during the
certification survey calendar year;

(((jj))) (kk)
Compensation paid for any purchased nursing care services, including registered
nurse, licensed practical nurse, and nurse assistant services, obtained through
service contract arrangement in excess of the amount of compensation paid for
such hours of nursing care service had they been paid at the average hourly
wage, including related taxes and benefits, for in-house nursing care staff of
like classification at the same nursing facility, as reported in the most
recent cost report period;

(((kk))) (ll)
For all partial or whole rate periods after July 17, 1984, costs of land and
depreciable assets that cannot be reimbursed under the Deficit Reduction Act of
1984 and implementing state statutory and regulatory provisions;

(((ll))) (mm)
Costs reported by the contractor for a prior period to the extent such costs,
due to statutory exemption, will not be incurred by the contractor in the
period to be covered by the rate;

(((mm))) (nn)
Costs of outside activities, for example, costs allocated to the use of a
vehicle for personal purposes or related to the part of a facility leased out
for office space;

(((nn))) (oo)
Travel expenses outside the states of Idaho, Oregon, and Washington and the
province of British Columbia. However, travel to or from the home or central
office of a chain organization operating a nursing facility is allowed whether
inside or outside these areas if the travel is necessary, ordinary, and related
to resident care;

(((oo))) (pp)
Moving expenses of employees in the absence of demonstrated, good-faith effort
to recruit within the states of Idaho, Oregon, and Washington, and the province
of British Columbia;

(((pp))) (qq)
Depreciation in excess of four thousand dollars per year for each passenger car
or other vehicle primarily used by the administrator, facility staff, or
central office staff;

(((qq))) (rr)
Costs for temporary health care personnel from a nursing pool not registered
with the secretary of the department of health;

(((rr))) (ss)
Payroll taxes associated with compensation in excess of allowable compensation
of owners, relatives, and administrative personnel;

(((ss))) (tt)
Costs and fees associated with filing a petition for bankruptcy;

(((tt))) (uu)
All advertising or promotional costs, except reasonable costs of help wanted
advertising;

(((uu))) (vv)
Outside consultation expenses required to meet department-required minimum data
set completion proficiency;

(((vv))) (ww)
Interest charges assessed by any department or agency of this state for failure
to make a timely refund of overpayments and interest expenses incurred for
loans obtained to make the refunds;

(((ww))) (xx)
All home ((office)) or central office costs, whether on or off the
nursing facility premises, and whether allocated or not to specific services,
in excess of the median of those adjusted costs for all facilities reporting such
costs for the most recent report period; and

(((xx))) (yy)
Tax expenses that a nursing facility has never incurred.

Sec. 4. RCW 74.46.421 and 1999 c
353 s 3 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) The purpose of part
E of this chapter is to determine nursing facility medicaid payment rates that,
in the aggregate for all participating nursing facilities, are in accordance
with the biennial appropriations act.

(2)(a) The department
shall use the nursing facility medicaid payment rate methodologies described in
this chapter to determine initial component rate allocations for each medicaid
nursing facility.

(b) The initial
component rate allocations shall be subject to adjustment as provided in this
section in order to assure that the statewide average payment rate to nursing
facilities is less than or equal to the statewide average payment rate
specified in the biennial appropriations act.

(3) Nothing in this
chapter shall be construed as creating a legal right or entitlement to any
payment that (a) has not been adjusted under this section or (b) would cause
the statewide average payment rate to exceed the statewide average payment rate
specified in the biennial appropriations act.

(4)(((a) The
statewide average payment rate for the capital portion of the rate for any
state fiscal year under the nursing facility medicaid payment system, weighted
by patient days, shall not exceed the annual statewide weighted average nursing
facility payment rate for the capital portion of the rate identified for that
fiscal year in the biennial appropriations act.

(b) If the
department determines that the weighted average nursing facility payment rate
for the capital portion of the rate calculated in accordance with this chapter
is likely to exceed the weighted average nursing facility payment rate for the
capital portion of the rate identified in the biennial appropriations act, then
the department shall adjust all nursing facility property and financing
allowance payment rates proportional to the amount by which the weighted
average rate allocations would otherwise exceed the budgeted capital portion of
the rate amount. Any such adjustments shall only be made prospectively, not
retrospectively, and shall be applied proportionately to each component rate
allocation for each facility.

(5)))(a) The statewide average payment rate for the
noncapital portion of the rate for any state fiscal year under the nursing
facility payment system, weighted by patient days, shall not exceed the annual
statewide weighted average nursing facility payment rate for the noncapital
portion of the rate identified for that fiscal year in the biennial
appropriations act.

(b) If the department
determines that the weighted average nursing facility payment rate for the
noncapital portion of the rate calculated in accordance with this chapter is
likely to exceed the weighted average nursing facility payment rate for the
noncapital portion of the rate identified in the biennial appropriations act,
then the department shall adjust all nursing facility direct care, therapy
care, support services, operations, and variable return payment rates
proportional to the amount by which the weighted average rate allocations would
otherwise exceed the budgeted noncapital portion of the rate amount. Any such
adjustments shall only be made prospectively, not retrospectively, and shall be
applied proportionately to each direct care, therapy care, support services,
operations, and variable return rate allocation for each facility.

Sec. 5. RCW 74.46.431 and 1999 c
353 s 4 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) Effective July 1,
1999, nursing facility medicaid payment rate allocations shall be
facility-specific and shall have seven components: Direct care, therapy care,
support services, operations, property, financing allowance, and variable
return. The department shall establish and adjust each of these components, as
provided in this section and elsewhere in this chapter, for each medicaid
nursing facility in this state.

(2) All component rate
allocations shall be based upon a minimum facility occupancy of eighty-five
percent of licensed beds, regardless of how many beds are set up or in use.

(3) Information and
data sources used in determining medicaid payment rate allocations, including
formulas, procedures, cost report periods, resident assessment instrument
formats, resident assessment methodologies, and resident classification and
case mix weighting methodologies, may be substituted or altered from time to
time as determined by the department.

(4)(a) Direct care
component rate allocations shall be established using adjusted cost report data
covering at least six months. Adjusted cost report data from 1996 will be used
for October 1, 1998, through June 30, 2001, direct care component rate
allocations; adjusted cost report data from 1999 will be used for July 1, 2001,
through June 30, 2004, direct care component rate allocations.

(b) Direct care
component rate allocations based on 1996 cost report data shall be adjusted
annually for economic trends and conditions by a factor or factors defined in
the biennial appropriations act. A different economic trends and conditions
adjustment factor or factors may be defined in the biennial appropriations act
for facilities whose direct care component rate is set equal to their adjusted
June 30, 1998, rate, as provided in RCW 74.46.506(5)(k).

(c) Direct care
component rate allocations based on 1999 cost report data shall be adjusted
annually for economic trends and conditions by a factor or factors defined in
the biennial appropriations act. A different economic trends and conditions
adjustment factor or factors may be defined in the biennial appropriations act
for facilities whose direct care component rate is set equal to their adjusted
June 30, 1998, rate, as provided in RCW 74.46.506(5)(k).

(5)(a) Therapy care
component rate allocations shall be established using adjusted cost report data
covering at least six months. Adjusted cost report data from 1996 will be used
for October 1, 1998, through June 30, 2001, therapy care component rate
allocations; adjusted cost report data from 1999 will be used for July 1, 2001,
through June 30, 2004, therapy care component rate allocations.

(b) Therapy care
component rate allocations shall be adjusted annually for economic trends and
conditions by a factor or factors defined in the biennial appropriations act.

(6)(a) Support services
component rate allocations shall be established using adjusted cost report data
covering at least six months. Adjusted cost report data from 1996 shall be
used for October 1, 1998, through June 30, 2001, support services component rate
allocations; adjusted cost report data from 1999 shall be used for July 1,
2001, through June 30, 2004, support services component rate allocations.

(b) Support services
component rate allocations shall be adjusted annually for economic trends and
conditions by a factor or factors defined in the biennial appropriations act.

(7)(a) Operations
component rate allocations shall be established using adjusted cost report data
covering at least six months. Adjusted cost report data from 1996 shall be
used for October 1, 1998, through June 30, 2001, operations component rate
allocations; adjusted cost report data from 1999 shall be used for July 1,
2001, through June 30, 2004, operations component rate allocations.

(b) Operations
component rate allocations shall be adjusted annually for economic trends and
conditions by a factor or factors defined in the biennial appropriations act.

(8) For July 1, 1998,
through September 30, 1998, a facility's property and return on investment
component rates shall be the facility's June 30, 1998, property and return on
investment component rates, without increase. For October 1, 1998, through
June 30, 1999, a facility's property and return on investment component rates
shall be rebased utilizing 1997 adjusted cost report data covering at least six
months of data.

(9) Total payment rates
under the nursing facility medicaid payment system shall not exceed facility
rates charged to the general public for comparable services.

(10) Medicaid
contractors shall pay to all facility staff a minimum wage of the greater of ((five
dollars and fifteen cents per hour)) the state minimum wage or the
federal minimum wage.

(11) The department
shall establish in rule procedures, principles, and conditions for determining
component rate allocations for facilities in circumstances not directly
addressed by this chapter, including but not limited to: The need to prorate
inflation for partial-period cost report data, newly constructed facilities,
existing facilities entering the medicaid program for the first time or after a
period of absence from the program, existing facilities with expanded new bed
capacity, existing medicaid facilities following a change of ownership of the
nursing facility business, facilities banking beds or converting beds back into
service, facilities having less than six months of either resident assessment,
cost report data, or both, under the current contractor prior to rate setting,
and other circumstances.

(12) The
department shall establish in rule procedures, principles, and conditions,
including necessary threshold costs, for adjusting rates to reflect capital
improvements or new requirements imposed by the department or the federal
government. Any such rate adjustments are subject to the provisions of RCW 74.46.421.

Sec. 6. RCW 74.46.433 and 1999 c
353 s 9 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) The department
shall establish for each medicaid nursing facility a variable return component
rate allocation. In determining the variable return allowance:

(a) The variable return
array and percentage ((assigned at the October 1, 1998, rate setting shall
remain in effect until June 30, 2001)) shall be assigned whenever
rebasing of noncapital rate allocations is scheduled under RCW 46.46.431 (4),
(5), (6), and (7).

(b) To calculate the
array of facilities for the July 1, 2001, rate setting, the department, without
using peer groups, shall first rank all facilities in numerical order from
highest to lowest according to each facility's examined and documented, but
unlidded, combined direct care, therapy care, support services, and operations
per resident day cost from the 1999 cost report period. However, before being
combined with other per resident day costs and ranked, a facility's direct care
cost per resident day shall be adjusted to reflect its facility average case
mix index, to be averaged from the four calendar quarters of 1999, weighted by
the facility's resident days from each quarter, under RCW 74.46.501(7)(b)(ii).
The array shall then be divided into four quartiles, each containing, as nearly
as possible, an equal number of facilities, and four percent shall be assigned
to facilities in the lowest quartile, three percent to facilities in the next
lowest quartile, two percent to facilities in the next highest quartile, and
one percent to facilities in the highest quartile.

(c) The
department shall ((then)) compute the variable return allowance by
multiplying ((the appropriate)) a facility's assigned percentage
((amounts, which shall not be less than one percent and not greater than
four percent,)) by the sum of the facility's direct care, therapy care,
support services, and operations ((rate components. The percentage amounts
will be based on groupings of facilities according to the rankings prescribed
in (a) of this subsection, as applicable. Those groups of facilities with
lower per diem costs shall receive higher percentage amounts than those with
higher per diem costs)) component rates determined in accordance with
this chapter and rules adopted by the department.

(2) The variable return
rate allocation calculated in accordance with this section shall be adjusted to
the extent necessary to comply with RCW 74.46.421.

Sec. 7. RCW 74.46.435 and 1999 c
353 s 10 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) The property
component rate allocation for each facility shall be determined by dividing the
sum of the reported allowable prior period actual depreciation, subject to RCW
74.46.310 through 74.46.380, adjusted for any capitalized additions or
replacements approved by the department, and the retained savings from such
cost center, by the greater of a facility's total resident days for the
facility in the prior period or resident days as calculated on eighty-five
percent facility occupancy. If a capitalized addition or retirement of an
asset will result in a different licensed bed capacity during the ensuing
period, the prior period total resident days used in computing the property
component rate shall be adjusted to anticipated resident day level.

(2) A nursing
facility's property component rate allocation shall be rebased annually,
effective July 1st ((or October 1st as applicable)), in accordance with
this section and this chapter.

(3) When a certificate
of need for a new facility is requested, the department, in reaching its
decision, shall take into consideration per-bed land and building construction
costs for the facility which shall not exceed a maximum to be established by
the secretary.

(4) For the purpose of
calculating a nursing facility's property component rate, if a contractor
elects to bank licensed beds or to convert banked beds to active service, under
chapter 70.38 RCW, the department shall use the facility's anticipated resident
occupancy level subsequent to the decrease or increase in licensed bed
capacity. However, in no case shall the department use less than eighty-five
percent occupancy of the facility's licensed bed capacity after banking or
conversion.

(((5)
The property component rate allocations calculated in accordance with this
section shall be adjusted to the extent necessary to comply with RCW 74.46.421.))

Sec. 8. RCW 74.46.437 and 1999 c
353 s 11 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) Beginning July 1,
1999, the department shall establish for each medicaid nursing facility a
financing allowance component rate allocation. The financing allowance
component rate shall be rebased annually, effective July 1st, in accordance
with the provisions of this section and this chapter.

(2) The financing
allowance shall be determined by multiplying the net invested funds of each
facility by .10, and dividing by the greater of a nursing facility's total
resident days from the most recent cost report period or resident days
calculated on eighty-five percent facility occupancy. However, assets acquired
on or after May 17, 1999, shall be grouped in a separate financing allowance
calculation that shall be multiplied by .085. The financing allowance factor
of .085 shall not be applied to the net invested funds pertaining to new
construction or major renovations receiving certificate of need approval or an
exemption from certificate of need requirements under chapter 70.38 RCW, or to
working drawings that have been submitted to the department of health for
construction review approval, prior to May 17, 1999. If a capitalized addition
or retirement of an asset will result in a different licensed bed capacity
during the ensuing period, the prior period total resident days used in
computing the financing allowance shall be adjusted to the greater of the
anticipated resident day level or eighty-five percent of the new licensed bed
capacity.

(3) In computing the
portion of net invested funds representing the net book value of tangible fixed
assets, the same assets, depreciation bases, lives, and methods referred to in
RCW 74.46.330, 74.46.350, 74.46.360, 74.46.370, and 74.46.380, including owned
and leased assets, shall be utilized, except that the capitalized cost of land
upon which the facility is located and such other contiguous land which is
reasonable and necessary for use in the regular course of providing resident
care shall also be included. Subject to provisions and limitations contained
in this chapter, for land purchased by owners or lessors before July 18, 1984,
capitalized cost of land shall be the buyer's capitalized cost. For all
partial or whole rate periods after July 17, 1984, if the land is purchased
after July 17, 1984, capitalized cost shall be that of the owner of record on
July 17, 1984, or buyer's capitalized cost, whichever is lower. In the case of
leased facilities where the net invested funds are unknown or the contractor is
unable to provide necessary information to determine net invested funds, the
secretary shall have the authority to determine an amount for net invested
funds based on an appraisal conducted according to RCW 74.46.360(1).

(4) For the purpose of
calculating a nursing facility's financing allowance component rate, if a
contractor elects to bank licensed beds or to convert banked beds to active
service, under chapter 70.38 RCW, the department shall use the facility's
anticipated resident occupancy level subsequent to the decrease or increase in
licensed bed capacity. However, in no case shall the department use less than
eighty-five percent occupancy of the facility's licensed bed capacity after
banking or conversion.

(((5) The financing
allowance rate allocation calculated in accordance with this section shall be
adjusted to the extent necessary to comply with RCW 74.46.421.))

Sec. 9. RCW 74.46.501 and 1998 c
322 s 24 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) From individual
case mix weights for the applicable quarter, the department shall determine two
average case mix indexes for each medicaid nursing facility, one for all
residents in the facility, known as the facility average case mix index, and
one for medicaid residents, known as the medicaid average case mix index.

(2)(a) In calculating a
facility's two average case mix indexes for each quarter, the department shall
include all residents or medicaid residents, as applicable, who were physically
in the facility during the quarter in question (January 1st through March 31st,
April 1st through June 30th, July 1st through September 30th, or October 1st
through December 31st).

(b) The facility
average case mix index shall exclude all default cases as defined in this
chapter. However, the medicaid average case mix index shall include all
default cases.

(3) Both the facility
average and the medicaid average case mix indexes shall be determined by
multiplying the case mix weight of each resident, or each medicaid resident, as
applicable, by the number of days, as defined in this section and as
applicable, the resident was at each particular case mix classification or
group, and then averaging.

(4)(a) In determining
the number of days a resident is classified into a particular case mix group,
the department shall determine a start date for calculating case mix grouping
periods as follows:

(i) If a resident's
initial assessment for a first stay or a return stay in the nursing facility is
timely completed and transmitted to the department by the cutoff date under
state and federal requirements and as described in subsection (5) of this
section, the start date shall be the later of either the first day of the
quarter or the resident's facility admission or readmission date;

(ii) If a resident's
significant change, quarterly, or annual assessment is timely completed and
transmitted to the department by the cutoff date under state and federal
requirements and as described in subsection (5) of this section, the start date
shall be the date the assessment is completed;

(iii) If a resident's
significant change, quarterly, or annual assessment is not timely completed and
transmitted to the department by the cutoff date under state and federal
requirements and as described in subsection (5) of this section, the start date
shall be the due date for the assessment.

(b) If state or federal
rules require more frequent assessment, the same principles for determining the
start date of a resident's classification in a particular case mix group set
forth in subsection (4)(a) of this section shall apply.

(c) In calculating the
number of days a resident is classified into a particular case mix group, the
department shall determine an end date for calculating case mix grouping periods
as follows:

(i) If a resident is
discharged before the end of the applicable quarter, the end date shall be the
day before discharge;

(ii) If a resident is
not discharged before the end of the applicable quarter, the end date shall be
the last day of the quarter;

(iii) If a new
assessment is due for a resident or a new assessment is completed and
transmitted to the department, the end date of the previous assessment shall be
the earlier of either the day before the assessment is due or the day before
the assessment is completed by the nursing facility.

(5) The cutoff date for
the department to use resident assessment data, for the purposes of calculating
both the facility average and the medicaid average case mix indexes, and for
establishing and updating a facility's direct care component rate, shall be one
month and one day after the end of the quarter for which the resident
assessment data applies.

(6) A threshold of
ninety percent, as described and calculated in this subsection, shall be used to
determine the case mix index each quarter. The threshold shall also be used to
determine which facilities' costs per case mix unit are included in determining
the ceiling, floor, and price. If the facility does not meet the ninety
percent threshold, the department may use an alternate case mix index to
determine the facility average and medicaid average case mix indexes for the
quarter. The threshold is a count of unique minimum data set assessments, and
it shall include resident assessment instrument tracking forms for residents
discharged prior to completing an initial assessment. The threshold is
calculated by dividing ((the)) a facility's count of ((unique
minimum data set assessments)) residents being assessed by the
average census for ((each)) the facility. A daily census shall
be reported by each nursing facility as it transmits assessment data to the
department. The department shall compute a quarterly average census based on
the daily census. If no census has been reported by a facility during a
specified quarter, then the department shall use the facility's licensed beds
as the denominator in computing the threshold.

(7)(a) Although the
facility average and the medicaid average case mix indexes shall both be
calculated quarterly, the facility average case mix index will be used only
every three years in combination with cost report data as specified by RCW
74.46.431 and 74.46.506, to establish a facility's allowable cost per case mix
unit. A facility's medicaid average case mix index shall be used to update a
nursing facility's direct care component rate quarterly.

(b) The facility
average case mix index used to establish each nursing facility's direct care
component rate shall be based on an average of calendar quarters of the
facility's average case mix indexes.

(i) For October 1,
1998, direct care component rates, the department shall use an average of
facility average case mix indexes from the four calendar quarters of 1997.

(ii) For July 1, 2001,
direct care component rates, the department shall use an average of facility
average case mix indexes from the four calendar quarters of 1999.

(c) The medicaid
average case mix index used to update or recalibrate a nursing facility's
direct care component rate quarterly shall be from the calendar quarter
commencing six months prior to the effective date of the quarterly rate. For
example, October 1, 1998, through December 31, 1998, direct care component
rates shall utilize case mix averages from the April 1, 1998, through June 30,
1998, calendar quarter, and so forth.

Sec. 10. RCW 74.46.506 and 1999 c
353 s 5 and 1999 c 181 s 1 are each reenacted and amended to read as follows:

(1) The direct care
component rate allocation corresponds to the provision of nursing care for one
resident of a nursing facility for one day, including direct care supplies.
Therapy services and supplies, which correspond to the therapy care component
rate, shall be excluded. The direct care component rate includes elements of
case mix determined consistent with the principles of this section and other
applicable provisions of this chapter.

(2) Beginning October
1, 1998, the department shall determine and update quarterly for each nursing
facility serving medicaid residents a facility-specific per-resident day direct
care component rate allocation, to be effective on the first day of each
calendar quarter. In determining direct care component rates the department
shall utilize, as specified in this section, minimum data set resident assessment
data for each resident of the facility, as transmitted to, and if necessary
corrected by, the department in the resident assessment instrument format
approved by federal authorities for use in this state.

(3) The department may
question the accuracy of assessment data for any resident and utilize corrected
or substitute information, however derived, in determining direct care
component rates. The department is authorized to impose civil fines and to
take adverse rate actions against a contractor, as specified by the department
in rule, in order to obtain compliance with resident assessment and data
transmission requirements and to ensure accuracy.

(4) Cost report data
used in setting direct care component rate allocations shall be 1996 and 1999,
for rate periods as specified in RCW 74.46.431(4)(a).

(5) Beginning October
1, 1998, the department shall rebase each nursing facility's direct care component
rate allocation as described in RCW 74.46.431, adjust its direct care component
rate allocation for economic trends and conditions as described in RCW
74.46.431, and update its medicaid average case mix index, consistent with the
following:

(a) Reduce total direct
care costs reported by each nursing facility for the applicable cost report
period specified in RCW 74.46.431(4)(a) to reflect any department adjustments,
and to eliminate reported resident therapy costs and adjustments, in order to
derive the facility's total allowable direct care cost;

(b) Divide each
facility's total allowable direct care cost by its adjusted resident days for
the same report period, increased if necessary to a minimum occupancy of
eighty-five percent; that is, the greater of actual or imputed occupancy at
eighty-five percent of licensed beds, to derive the facility's allowable direct
care cost per resident day;

(c) Adjust the
facility's per resident day direct care cost by the applicable factor specified
in RCW 74.46.431(4) (b) and (c) to derive its adjusted allowable direct care
cost per resident day;

(d) Divide each
facility's adjusted allowable direct care cost per resident day by the facility
average case mix index for the applicable quarters specified by RCW 74.46.501(7)(b)
to derive the facility's allowable direct care cost per case mix unit;

(e) Divide nursing
facilities into two peer groups: Those located in metropolitan statistical
areas as determined and defined by the United States office of management and
budget or other appropriate agency or office of the federal government, and
those not located in a metropolitan statistical area;

(f) Array separately
the allowable direct care cost per case mix unit for all metropolitan
statistical area and for all nonmetropolitan statistical area facilities, and
determine the median allowable direct care cost per case mix unit for each peer
group;

(g) Except as provided
in (k) of this subsection, from October 1, 1998, through June 30, 2000,
determine each facility's quarterly direct care component rate as follows:

(i) Any facility whose
allowable cost per case mix unit is less than eighty-five percent of the
facility's peer group median established under (f) of this subsection shall be
assigned a cost per case mix unit equal to eighty-five percent of the
facility's peer group median, and shall have a direct care component rate
allocation equal to the facility's assigned cost per case mix unit multiplied
by that facility's medicaid average case mix index from the applicable quarter
specified in RCW 74.46.501(7)(c);

(ii) Any facility whose
allowable cost per case mix unit is greater than one hundred fifteen percent of
the peer group median established under (f) of this subsection shall be
assigned a cost per case mix unit equal to one hundred fifteen percent of the
peer group median, and shall have a direct care component rate allocation equal
to the facility's assigned cost per case mix unit multiplied by that facility's
medicaid average case mix index from the applicable quarter specified in RCW
74.46.501(7)(c);

(iii) Any facility
whose allowable cost per case mix unit is between eighty-five and one hundred
fifteen percent of the peer group median established under (f) of this
subsection shall have a direct care component rate allocation equal to the
facility's allowable cost per case mix unit multiplied by that facility's
medicaid average case mix index from the applicable quarter specified in RCW
74.46.501(7)(c);

(h) Except as provided
in (k) of this subsection, from July 1, 2000, through June 30, 2002, determine
each facility's quarterly direct care component rate as follows:

(i) Any facility whose
allowable cost per case mix unit is less than ninety percent of the facility's
peer group median established under (f) of this subsection shall be assigned a
cost per case mix unit equal to ninety percent of the facility's peer group
median, and shall have a direct care component rate allocation equal to the
facility's assigned cost per case mix unit multiplied by that facility's
medicaid average case mix index from the applicable quarter specified in RCW
74.46.501(7)(c);

(ii) Any facility whose
allowable cost per case mix unit is greater than one hundred ten percent of the
peer group median established under (f) of this subsection shall be assigned a
cost per case mix unit equal to one hundred ten percent of the peer group
median, and shall have a direct care component rate allocation equal to the
facility's assigned cost per case mix unit multiplied by that facility's
medicaid average case mix index from the applicable quarter specified in RCW
74.46.501(7)(c);

(iii) Any facility
whose allowable cost per case mix unit is between ninety and one hundred ten
percent of the peer group median established under (f) of this subsection shall
have a direct care component rate allocation equal to the facility's allowable
cost per case mix unit multiplied by that facility's medicaid average case mix
index from the applicable quarter specified in RCW 74.46.501(7)(c);

(i) From July 1, 2002, through
June 30, 2004, determine each facility's quarterly direct care component rate
as follows:

(i) Any facility whose
allowable cost per case mix unit is less than ninety-five percent of the
facility's peer group median established under (f) of this subsection shall be
assigned a cost per case mix unit equal to ninety-five percent of the
facility's peer group median, and shall have a direct care component rate
allocation equal to the facility's assigned cost per case mix unit multiplied
by that facility's medicaid average case mix index from the applicable quarter
specified in RCW 74.46.501(7)(c);

(ii) Any facility whose
allowable cost per case mix unit is greater than one hundred five percent of
the peer group median established under (f) of this subsection shall be
assigned a cost per case mix unit equal to one hundred five percent of the peer
group median, and shall have a direct care component rate allocation equal to
the facility's assigned cost per case mix unit multiplied by that facility's
medicaid average case mix index from the applicable quarter specified in RCW
74.46.501(7)(c);

(iii) Any facility
whose allowable cost per case mix unit is between ninety-five and one hundred
five percent of the peer group median established under (f) of this subsection
shall have a direct care component rate allocation equal to the facility's
allowable cost per case mix unit multiplied by that facility's medicaid average
case mix index from the applicable quarter specified in RCW 74.46.501(7)(c);

(j) Beginning July 1,
2004, determine each facility's quarterly direct care component rate by
multiplying the facility's peer group median allowable direct care cost per
case mix unit by that facility's medicaid average case mix index from the
applicable quarter as specified in RCW 74.46.501(7)(c).

(k)(i) Between October
1, 1998, and June 30, 2000, the department shall compare each facility's direct
care component rate allocation calculated under (g) of this subsection with the
facility's nursing services component rate in effect on September 30, 1998,
less therapy costs, plus any exceptional care offsets as reported on the cost
report, adjusted for economic trends and conditions as provided in RCW
74.46.431. A facility shall receive the higher of the two rates;

(ii) Between July 1,
2000, and June 30, 2002, the department shall compare each facility's direct
care component rate allocation calculated under (h) of this subsection with the
facility's direct care component rate in effect on June 30, 2000. A facility
shall receive the higher of the two rates. Between July 1, 2001, and June
30, 2002, if during any quarter a facility whose rate paid under (h) of this
subsection is greater than the direct care rate in effect on June 30, 2000, the
facility shall be paid in that and each subsequent quarter pursuant to (h) of
this subsection and shall not be entitled to the greater of the two rates.

(6) The direct care
component rate allocations calculated in accordance with this section shall be
adjusted to the extent necessary to comply with RCW 74.46.421.

(7) Payments resulting
from increases in direct care component rates, granted under authority of RCW
74.46.508(1) for a facility's exceptional care residents, shall be offset
against the facility's examined, allowable direct care costs, for each report
year or partial period such increases are paid. Such reductions in allowable
direct care costs shall be for rate setting, settlement, and other purposes
deemed appropriate by the department.

Sec. 11. RCW 74.46.711 and 1995
1st sp.s. c 18 s 69 are each amended to read as follows:

Upon the death of a
resident with a personal fund deposited with the facility, the facility must
convey within ((forty-five)) thirty days the resident's funds,
and a final accounting of those funds, to the individual or probate
jurisdiction administering the resident's estate; but in the case of a resident
who received long-term care services paid in whole or in part by the
department, the funds and accounting shall be sent to the state of
Washington, department of social and health services, office of financial
recovery. The department shall establish a release procedure for use for
burial expenses.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
12. A new section is added
to chapter 74.46 RCW to read as follows:

The total capital
authorization available for any biennial period shall be specified in the
biennial appropriations act and shall be calculated on an annual basis. When
setting the capital authorization level, the legislature shall consider both
the need for, and the cost of, new and replacement beds.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
13. A new section is added
to chapter 74.46 RCW to read as follows:

The department shall
establish rules for issuing a certificate of capital authorization.
Applications for a certificate of capital authorization shall be submitted and
approved on a biennial basis. The rules for a certificate of capital
authorization shall be consistent with the following principles:

(1) The certificate of
capital authorization shall be approved on a first-come, first-served basis.

(2) Those projects that
do not receive approval in one authorization period shall have priority the
following biennium should the project be resubmitted.

(3) The department
shall have the authority to give priority for a project that is necessitated by
an emergency situation even if the project is not submitted in a timely
fashion. The department shall establish rules for determining what constitutes
an emergency.

(4) The department
shall establish deadlines for progress and the department shall have the
authority to withdraw the certificate of capital authorization where the holder
of the certificate has not complied with those deadlines in a good faith
manner.

Sec. 14. 1998 c 322 s 47
(uncodified) is amended to read as follows:

(1) By December 1,
1998, the department of social and health services shall study and provide
recommendations to the chairs of the house of representatives appropriations
and health care committees, and the senate ways and means and health and
long-term care committees, concerning options for changing the method for
paying facilities for capital and property related expenses.

(2) The department of social
and health services shall contract with an independent and recognized
organization to study and evaluate the impacts of chapter 74.46 RCW
implementation on access, quality of care, quality of life for nursing facility
residents, and the wage and benefit levels of all nursing facility employees.
The department shall require, and the contractor shall submit, a report with
the results of this study and evaluation, including their findings, to the
governor and legislature by December 1, 2001.

(3) ((The department
of social and health services shall study and, as needed, specify additional
case mix groups and appropriate case mix weights to reflect the resource
utilization of residents whose care needs are not adequately identified or
reflected in the resource utilization group III grouper version 5.10. At a
minimum, the department shall study the adequacy of the resource utilization
group III grouper version 5.10, including the minimum data set, for capturing
the care and resource utilization needs of residents with AIDS, residents with
traumatic brain injury, and residents who are behaviorally challenged. The
department shall report its findings to the chairs of the house of
representatives health care committee and the senate health and long-term care committee
by December 12, 2002.

(4))) By December 12, 2002, the department of social
and health services shall report to the legislature and provide an evaluation
of the fiscal impact of rebasing future payments at different intervals,
including the impact of averaging two years' cost data as the basis for
rebasing. This report shall include the fiscal impact to the state and the
fiscal impact to nursing facility providers.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
15. (1) It is the intent of
the legislature to revise the methodology for setting direct care rates for
facilities paid pursuant to chapter 74.46 RCW on or before July 1, 2002. In
the process of revising those rates, the legislature recognizes that other rate
components including, but not limited to, property, financing allowance, and
operations may need revision.

(2) The legislature
recognizes and affirms that case mix is an important tool in linking rates to
client and care needs and that case mix will continue to be an important part
of any new approach. The new system must:

(a) Continue to link
client acuity to the direct care rate using case mix;

(b) Consider an
approach linking client acuity, as measured by case mix, to the number of hours
of services assumed to be provided for each client and then link the hours of
service assumed to be provided to the direct care rate by multiplying the hours
by an assumed wage and benefit rate;

(c) Account for
differences in wage and benefit rates in various areas of the state. The
comparison is to be done primarily using settled cost reports for the most
recent year for which reliable data, after settlements, is available;

(d) Provide cost
controls and incentives at least equal to the rate system currently in place;

(e) Not contain
automatic cost increases, automatic indexing, hold harmless provisions, or
mandatory future rebasing of costs; and

(f) Cost no more than
the rate system in place as assumed in the 2001-2003 omnibus appropriations act
adopted during the 2001 legislative session.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
16. The joint legislative
task force on nursing home rates is hereby created.

(1) Membership of the
task force shall consist of eight legislators. The president of the senate
shall appoint four members of the senate, including two members of the majority
party and two members of the minority party. The co-speakers of the house of
representatives shall appoint four members of the house of representatives,
including two members from each party. Each body shall select representatives
from committees with jurisdiction over health and long-term care and fiscal
matters.

(2) The joint
legislative task force shall work together with the department of social and
health services and with interested parties to develop a proposed rate system
that meets the requirements set forth in section 15 of this act.

(3)(a) The department
shall identify and present to the joint legislative task force several
alternatives; however, it shall identify the alternative that best meets the
goals set forth in section 15 of this act. All alternatives developed by the
department must be provided to the joint legislative task force and to
interested parties no later than October 31, 2001.

(b) For each
alternative, the department shall also calculate a system of shadow rates that
shows what the facility rate is for fiscal year 2002, the direct care costs
reflected in the 1999 cost reports, what the payments would be in fiscal year
2002 if the alternative were in effect at that time, what the payments would be
in fiscal year 2003 under the current system, and what the payments would be in
fiscal year 2003 under the alternative. The rate information must be provided
to the joint legislative task force and to all interested parties no later than
November 15, 2001.

(4) To mitigate
potential impacts that the expiration of the current hold harmless system may
have on the direct care rate, the joint legislative task force shall:

(a) Consider increasing
minimum occupancy standards;

(b) Consider not
modifying property, financing allowance, or operations rate components for
prospective reductions in licensed bed capacity through bed banking;

(c) Assume that any
savings generated by this subsection be applied towards increasing the direct
care rate.

(5) The joint
legislative task force shall complete its review and submit its recommendations
in the form of a report to the appropriate policy and fiscal committees of the
legislature by December 1, 2001.

(6) This section
expires December 31, 2001.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
17. RCW 74.46.908 (Repealer) and 1999 c 353
s 17 are each repealed.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
18. RCW 74.46.506 (Direct care component
rate allocations--Determination--Quarterly updates--Fines) and 1999 c 353 s 5,
1999 c 181 s 1, & 1998 c 322 s 25 are each repealed.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
19. If specific funding for
the purposes of this act, referencing this act by bill or chapter number, is
not provided by June 29, 2001, in the omnibus appropriations act, this act is
null and void.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
20. (1) Sections 1 through 10
and 12 through 16 of this act are necessary for the immediate preservation of
the public peace, health, or safety, or support of the state government and its
existing public institutions, and take effect July 1, 2001.

(2) Sections 17 and 19 of
this act are necessary for the immediate preservation of the public peace,
health, or safety, or support of the state government and its existing public
institutions, and take effect June 29, 2001.

(3)
Section 18 of this act takes effect June 30, 2002.

---
END ---