BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF
WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec.
1. It is the intent of the
legislature to encourage and expand the commercial generation of electrical
power from alternative energy sources to meet the long-term energy needs of the
state. It is the further intent that incentives provided by the state encourage
free-market principles that foster technological innovation and entrepreneurial
investment in alternative energy sources. This intent is best served by
encouraging commercially viable, independent generators of alternative
energy-based electrical power to provide such power to established utility
distribution networks, including investor-owned utilities and public utility
districts.

It is also the intent
of the legislature that, to promote the use of alternative energy sources for
the purpose of electrical generation, tax incentives should be provided in RCW
82.08.02567 and 82.12.02567 for the acquisition of certain machinery and
equipment to all qualifying sectors of the state economy, including industrial,
commercial, and residential.

Sec. 2. RCW 82.08.02567 and 1999
c 358 s 4 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) The tax levied by
RCW 82.08.020 shall not apply to sales of machinery and equipment used directly
in generating electricity ((using wind, sun, or landfill gas)), by
central station generation using renewable resources or by distributive
generation, as the principal source of power, or to sales of or charges
made for labor and services rendered in respect to installing such machinery
and equipment((, but only if the purchaser develops with such machinery,
equipment, and labor a facility capable of generating not less than two hundred
kilowatts of electricity and provides)). The purchaser must provide
the seller with an exemption certificate in a form and manner prescribed by the
department ((by rule)). The seller shall retain a copy of the
certificate for the seller's files.

(2) For purposes of
this section and RCW 82.12.02567:

(a) (("Landfill
gas" means biomass fuel of the type qualified for federal tax credits
under 26 U.S.C. Sec. 29 collected from a landfill. "Landfill" means
a landfill as defined under RCW 70.95.030)) "Renewable
resources" has the same meaning as provided in RCW 19.29A.010(26);

(b) "Machinery and
equipment" means industrial fixtures, devices, and support facilities that
are integral and necessary to the generation of electricity ((using wind,
sun, or landfill gas)), by central station generation using renewable
resources or by distributive generation, as the principal source of power;

(c) "Machinery and
equipment" does not include: (i) Hand-powered tools; (ii) property with a
useful life of less than one year; (iii) repair parts required to restore
machinery and equipment to normal working order; (iv) replacement parts that do
not increase productivity, improve efficiency, or extend the useful life of
machinery and equipment; (v) buildings; or (vi) building fixtures that are not
integral and necessary to the generation of electricity that are permanently
affixed to and become a physical part of a building;

(d) Machinery and
equipment is "used directly" in generating electricity ((by wind
energy, solar, or landfill gas power)) if it provides any part of the
process that ((captures the energy of the wind, sun, or landfill gas,
converts that energy to electricity, and transforms or transmits that
electricity for entry into electric transmission and distribution systems))
produces electricity by central station generation using renewable resources
or by distributive generation;

(e) "Fuel
cell" means an electrochemical reaction that generates electricity by
combining atoms of hydrogen and oxygen in the presence of a catalyst;

(f) "Principal
source of power" means electricity that is generated to meet no less than
fifty percent of total average electrical load of a facility;

(g)
"Distributive generation" means the generation of electricity from an
integrated or stand-alone power plant that has a capacity of fifty megawatts or
less, that generates electricity from wind energy, solar energy, or fuel cells,
and that stores, transforms, or transmits that electricity for entry into or
operation in parallel with electric transmission and distribution systems.

(3) This section
expires June 30, ((2005)) 2016.

Sec. 3. RCW 82.12.02567 and 1999
c 358 s 10 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) The provisions of
this chapter shall not apply with respect to machinery and equipment used
directly in generating ((not less than two hundred kilowatts of))
electricity ((using wind, sun, or landfill gas)), by central station
generation using renewable resources or by distributive generation, as the
principal source of power.

(2) The definitions in
RCW 82.08.02567 apply to this section.

(3) This section
expires June 30, ((2005)) 2016.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
4. A new section is added
to chapter 82.16 RCW to read as follows:

(1) In computing tax
under this chapter, a light and power business may deduct from gross income
amounts equal to the following:

(a) The cost of the
purchase or lease of a facility used for the distributive generation of
electricity that is the principal source of power for retail electric
consumers; and

(b) The cost of electrical
energy generated from renewable resources on which construction is begun after
July 1, 2001, and before January 1, 2011.

(2) For the purposes of
this section, the definitions in RCW 82.08.02567 apply.

(3) This
section expires January 1, 2016.

---
END ---