BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF
WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec.
1. A new section is added
to chapter 82.08 RCW to read as follows:

(1) A person who has
paid tax under this chapter with respect to repairing or replacing an historic
building that was damaged by the February 28, 2001, earthquake is eligible for
an exemption in the form of a remittance, as provided in this section. A
person claiming an exemption must pay the tax and may then apply to the
department for remittance of retail sales tax paid under this chapter, chapter
82.14 RCW, and any other statute of this state. For the purposes of this
section, an historic building is a building that is on the national register of
historic places, the Washington heritage register, and any local register of
historic places established by a city, town, or county.

(2) The exemption in
this section applies to retail sales tax that has been paid on sales of:

(a) Tangible personal
property that became an ingredient or component of an historic building during
the repair of damage caused by the earthquake; and

(b) Labor and services
rendered with respect to repairing damage to an historic building caused by the
earthquake.

(3) A person claiming
exemption under this section must present the following to the department:

(a) Proof that retail
sales tax has been paid on sales exempt under this section;

(b) Proof that he or
she has received one or more of the following forms of assistance related to
earthquake damage to the building:

(i) A housing
assistance grant from the federal emergency management agency to repair a
damaged home;

(ii) A small business
administration loan to repair damages to a residential or commercial building;
or

(iii) A farm service
agency loan to repair damages to farm property; and

(c) Any other
information required by the department for the purposes of this section.

(4) This section
expires July 1, 2003.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
2. A new section is added
to chapter 82.12 RCW to read as follows:

(1) The provisions of
this chapter do not apply in respect to the use of tangible personal property
that became an ingredient or component of an historic building during the
repair of damage caused by the February 28, 2001, earthquake. As used in this
section, an historic building has the same meaning as that under section 1 of
this act.

(2) This section
expires July 1, 2003.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 3. This act is necessary for
the immediate preservation of the public peace, health, or safety, or support
of the state government and its existing public institutions, and takes effect
immediately.

---
END ---