BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF
WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec.
1. The legislature finds
that if social security numbers are accessible to the public, it will be
relatively easy for someone to use another's social security number
fraudulently to assume that person's identity and gain access to bank accounts,
credit services, billing information, driving history, and other sources of
personal information. The legislature intends to limit the collection and availability
of social security numbers to protect the public.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
2. A new section is added
to chapter 48.43 RCW to read as follows:

After January 1, 2003,
no carrier may use social security numbers from individuals as a personal
identification number.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 3. If any part of this act
is found to be in conflict with federal requirements that are a prescribed
condition to the allocation of federal funds to the state, the conflicting part
of this act is inoperative solely to the extent of the conflict and with
respect to the agencies directly affected, and this finding does not affect the
operation of the remainder of this act in its application to the agencies
concerned. Rules adopted under this act must meet federal requirements that
are a necessary condition to the receipt of federal funds by the state.

---
END ---