BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF
WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec.
1. Any person or
organization who sells, trades, gives, publishes, distributes, or otherwise
releases the residential address, residential telephone number, birthdate, or
social security number of any law enforcement-related or court-related employee
or volunteer, or someone with a similar name, and categorizes them as such,
without the express written permission of the employee or volunteer must
disclose the full legal name, the full residential or business street address,
and the full residential or business telephone number of the person or
organization selling, trading, giving, publishing, distributing, or otherwise
releasing the information, unless specifically exempted by law or court order.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
2. Any law
enforcement-related or court-related employee or volunteer who suffers damages
as a result of a person or organization wrongfully selling, trading, giving,
publishing, distributing, or otherwise releasing the residential address,
residential telephone number, birthdate, or social security number of the
employee or volunteer may bring an action against the person or organization in
court for actual damages sustained, plus attorneys' fees and costs.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 3. Sections 1 and 2 of this
act are each added to chapter 41.04 RCW.

---
END ---