BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF
WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1. RCW 43.21G.040 and 1987
c 505 s 83 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) The governor may
subject to the definitions and limitations provided in this chapter:

(a) Upon finding that
an energy supply alert exists within this state or any part thereof, declare a
condition of energy supply alert; or

(b) Upon finding that
an energy emergency exists within this state or any part thereof, declare a
condition of energy emergency. A condition of energy emergency shall terminate
thirty consecutive days after the declaration of such condition if the
legislature is not in session at the time of such declaration and if the
governor fails to convene the legislature pursuant to Article III, section 7 of
the Constitution of the state of Washington within thirty consecutive days of
such declaration. If the legislature is in session or convened, in accordance
with this subsection, the duration of the condition of energy emergency shall
be limited in accordance with subsection (3) of this section.

Upon the declaration of
a condition of energy supply alert or energy emergency, the governor shall
present to the committee any proposed plans for programs, controls, standards,
and priorities for the production, allocation, and consumption of energy during
any current or anticipated condition of energy emergency, any proposed plans
for the suspension or modification of existing rules of the Washington
Administrative Code, and any other relevant matters the governor deems
desirable. The governor shall review any recommendations of the committee
concerning such plans and matters.

Upon the declaration of
a condition of energy supply alert or energy emergency, the emergency powers as
set forth in this chapter shall become effective only within the area described
in the declaration.

(2) A condition of
energy supply alert shall terminate ninety consecutive days after the
declaration of such condition unless:

(a) Extended by the
governor upon issuing a finding that the energy supply alert continues to
exist, and with prior approval of such an extension by the committee; or

(b) Extended by the
governor based on a declaration by the president of the United States of a
national state of emergency in regard to energy supply; or

(c) Upon the request of
the governor, extended by declaration of the legislature by concurrent
resolution of a continuing energy supply alert.

In the event any such
initial extension is implemented, the condition shall terminate one hundred and
fifty consecutive days after the declaration of such condition. One or more
subsequent extensions may be implemented through the extension procedures set
forth in this subsection. In the event any such subsequent extension is
implemented, the condition shall terminate sixty consecutive days after the
implementation of such extension.

(3) A condition of
energy emergency shall terminate forty-five consecutive days after the
declaration of such condition unless:

(a) Extended by the
governor upon issuing a finding that the energy emergency continues to exist,
and with prior approval of such an extension by the committee; or

(b) Extended by the
governor based on a declaration by the president of the United States of a
national state of emergency in regard to energy supply; or

(c) Upon the request of
the governor, extended by declaration of the legislature by concurrent
resolution of a continuing energy emergency.

In the event any such
initial extension is implemented, the condition shall terminate ninety
consecutive days after the declaration of such condition. One or more
subsequent extensions may be implemented through the extension procedures set
forth in this subsection. In the event any such subsequent extension is
implemented, the condition shall terminate forty-five consecutive days after
the implementation of such extension.

(4) A condition of
energy supply alert or energy emergency shall cease to exist upon a declaration
to that effect by either of the following: (a) The governor; or (b) the
legislature, by concurrent resolution, if in regular or special session:
PROVIDED, That the governor shall terminate a condition of energy supply alert
or energy emergency when the energy supply situation upon which the declaration
of a condition of energy supply alert or energy emergency was based no longer
exists.

(5) In a condition of
energy supply alert, the governor may, as deemed necessary to preserve and protect
the public health, safety, and general welfare, and to minimize, to the fullest
extent possible, the injurious economic, social, and environmental consequences
of such energy supply alert, issue orders to: (a) Suspend or modify existing
rules of the Washington Administrative Code of any state agency relating to the
consumption of energy by such agency or to the production of energy, ((and))
(b) direct any state or local governmental agency to implement programs
relating to the consumption of energy by the agency which have been developed
by the governor or the agency and reviewed by the committee, and (c) with
the written approval of the committee, direct that the following specific
actions be taken by all citizens:

(i) Eliminate all
outdoor advertising sign illumination during nonbusiness hours and during
daylight hours;

(ii) Use only
lighting necessary for identifying business operations, such as signs
indicating "open" or "vacancy" during business hours
between sunset and closing;

(iii) Eliminate all
external and internal decorative lighting and floodlighting, except for the
minimum necessary for safety and security;

(iv) Reduce
commercial parking lot lighting to the minimum needed for safety during
business hours and after closing; and

(v) Minimize
interior after-dark building lighting except for safety and security.

(6) In addition to the
powers in subsection (5) of this section, in a condition of energy emergency,
the governor may, as deemed necessary to preserve and protect the public
health, safety, and general welfare, and to minimize, to the fullest extent
possible, the injurious economic, social, and environmental consequences of
such an emergency, issue orders to: (a) Implement programs, controls,
standards, and priorities for the production, allocation, and consumption of
energy; (b) suspend and modify existing pollution control standards and
requirements or any other standards or requirements affecting or affected by
the use of energy, including those relating to air or water quality control;
and (c) establish and implement regional programs and agreements for the
purposes of coordinating the energy programs and actions of the state with
those of the federal government and of other states and localities.

The governor shall
immediately transmit the declaration of a condition of energy supply alert or
energy emergency and the findings upon which the declaration is based and any
orders issued under the powers granted in this chapter to the committee.

Nothing in this chapter
shall be construed to mean that any program, control, standard, priority or
other policy created under the authority of the emergency powers authorized by
this chapter shall have any continuing legal effect after the cessation of the
condition of energy supply alert or energy emergency.

If any provision of
this chapter is in conflict with any other provision, limitation, or
restriction which is now in effect under any other law of this state,
including, but not limited to, chapter 34.05 RCW, this chapter shall govern and
control, and such other law or rule or regulation promulgated thereunder shall
be deemed superseded for the purposes of this chapter.

Because of the
emergency nature of this chapter, all actions authorized or required hereunder,
or taken pursuant to any order issued by the governor, shall be exempted from
any and all requirements and provisions of the state environmental policy act
of 1971, chapter 43.21C RCW, including, but not limited to, the requirement for
environmental impact statements.

Except as
provided in this section nothing in this chapter shall exempt a person from
compliance with the provisions of any other law, rule, or directive unless
specifically ordered by the governor.

--- END ---