BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF
WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec.
1. Citizens, students,
business people, professionals, and public officials depend on timely, accurate
information in order to be competitive and to make informed decisions. Many
Washington citizens have been at a disadvantage in accessing such information
due to economic or geographic barriers.

Washington's libraries
are demonstrated leaders in providing the public access to print and electronic
information. The legislature finds the statewide data base licensing program,
developed as a pilot project in 1998, has proven that licensing of on-line
information data bases at the state level is the most cost-effective way to
provide equitable, quality information resources to all citizens and that joint
state and local participation in obtaining cost-effective licenses increases
access to this quality information.

The legislature also
finds that access to these on-line resources should be available to every
citizen, every school, and every area in the state of Washington.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
2. A new section is added
to chapter 27.04 RCW to read as follows:

(1) There is created a
statewide data base licensing service to secure cost-effective access to
commercially produced information data base products. The information data
bases shall be made available to citizens of Washington through all types of
public, school, academic, and other nonprofit libraries in the state. The
Washington state library shall administer the service either directly or
through contract. Libraries shall make data bases available to their users
through a variety of venues, including computers and other computing devices in
schools and library buildings, and to homes.

(2) The
statewide data base licensing service shall be funded through a combination of
state general fund and local funds. It is intended that state general fund
moneys will pay for data base content and local funds will pay for administrative
costs of running the program. For the purpose of any general budget reduction,
state general fund moneys for the service shall be considered for reduction
separate and apart from general fund moneys appropriated for ongoing operations
of the state library.

---
END ---