BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF
WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec.
1. The sum of four hundred
fifty thousand dollars, or as much thereof as may be necessary, is appropriated
for the fiscal year ending June 30, 2001, from the general fund‑-state to
the department of agriculture. This appropriation shall be deposited in the
plant pest account in the agricultural local account and is provided solely to
reimburse county horticultural pest and disease boards for the cost of pest
control activities, including tree removal, conducted under their existing
authority in chapters 15.08 and 15.09 RCW.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 2. This act is necessary for
the immediate preservation of the public peace, health, or safety, or support
of the state government and its existing public institutions, and takes effect
immediately.

---
END ---