BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF
WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1. RCW 18.74.005 and 1983 c
116 s 1 are each amended to read as follows:

((In order to
safeguard the public safety and welfare, to protect the public from being
misled by incompetent, unethical, and unauthorized persons, and to assure the
highest degree of professional conduct and competency, it is the purpose of
this chapter to strengthen existing regulation of persons offering physical
therapy services to the public.)) The purpose of this chapter is to
protect the public health, safety, and welfare, and to provide for state
administrative control, supervision, licensure, and regulation of the practice
of physical therapy. It is the intent of the legislature that only individuals
who meet and maintain prescribed standards of competence and conduct be allowed
to engage in the practice of physical therapy as defined and authorized by this
chapter.

Sec. 2. RCW 18.74.010 and 1997 c
275 s 8 are each amended to read as follows:

((Unless the context
otherwise requires,)) The definitions in this section apply
throughout this chapter unless the context clearly requires otherwise.

(1) "Board"
means the board of physical therapy created by RCW 18.74.020.

(2)
"Department" means the department of health.

(3) "Physical
therapy" means the ((treatment of any bodily or mental condition of any
person by the use of the physical, chemical, and other properties of heat,
cold, air, light, water, electricity, sound, massage, and therapeutic exercise,
which includes posture and rehabilitation procedures; the performance of tests
and measurements of neuromuscular function as an aid to the diagnosis or
treatment of any human condition; performance of treatments on the basis of
test findings after consultation with and periodic review by an authorized health
care practitioner except as provided in RCW 18.74.012; supervision of selective
forms of treatment by trained supportive personnel; and provision of
consultative services for health, education, and community agencies. The use
of Roentgen rays and radium for diagnostic and therapeutic purposes, the use of
electricity for surgical purposes, including cauterization, and the use of
spinal manipulation or manipulative mobilization of the spine and its immediate
articulations, are not included under the term "physical therapy" as
used in this chapter)) care and services provided by or under the
direction and supervision of a physical therapist licensed by the state. The
use of spinal manipulation, or manipulative mobilization of the spine and its
immediate articulations, are not included under the term "physical
therapy" as used in this chapter.

(4) "Physical
therapist" means a person who ((practices physical therapy as defined
in this chapter but does not include massage operators as defined in RCW 18.108.010))
meets all the requirements of this chapter and is licensed in this state to
practice physical therapy.

(5)
"Secretary" means the secretary of health.

(6) Words importing the
masculine gender may be applied to females.

(7) "Authorized
health care practitioner" means and includes licensed physicians,
osteopathic physicians, chiropractors, naturopaths, podiatric physicians and
surgeons, dentists, and advanced registered nurse practitioners: PROVIDED,
HOWEVER, That nothing herein shall be construed as altering the scope of
practice of such practitioners as defined in their respective licensure laws.

(8) "Practice
of physical therapy" is based on movement science and means:

(a) Examining,
evaluating, and testing individuals with mechanical, physiological, and
developmental impairments, functional limitations in movement, and disability
or other health and movement-related conditions in order to determine a
diagnosis, prognosis, plan of therapeutic intervention, and to assess and
document the ongoing effects of intervention;

(b) Alleviating
impairments and functional limitations in movement by designing, implementing,
and modifying therapeutic interventions that include, but are not limited to,
therapeutic exercise; movement-related functional training in self-care,
in-home, community, or work reintegration; manual therapy including soft tissue
and joint mobilization and manipulation; therapeutic massage; orthotic,
assistive, adaptive, protective, and supportive devices related to postural
control and mobility that are not defined as a prosthesis or orthosis in RCW
18.200.010, although these procedures are not within the exclusive practice
scope of physical therapists; airway clearance techniques; debridement and
wound care; physical agents or modalities; mechanical and electrotherapeutic
modalities; and patient-related instruction;

(c) Reducing the
risk of injury, impairment, functional limitation, and disability related to
movement, including the promotion and maintenance of fitness, health, and
quality of life in all age populations;

(d) Engaging in
administration, consultation, education, and research; and

(e) Training for,
and the evaluation of, the function of a patient wearing a prosthesis or
orthosis as defined in RCW 18.200.010. Physical therapists may consult with a
licensed prosthetist or orthotist in order to make recommendations to provide
or adjust a prosthesis or orthosis.

(9)(a)
"Physical therapist assistant" means a person who performs physical
therapy procedures and related tasks that have been selected and delegated only
by the supervising physical therapist.

(b) "Physical
therapy aide" means a person trained under the direction of a physical
therapist who performs designated and supervised routine physical therapy
tasks.

(c) "Other
assistive personnel" means other trained or educated health care
personnel, not defined in (a) or (b) of this subsection, who perform specific
designated tasks related to physical therapy under the supervision of a
physical therapist. At the direction of the supervising physical therapist,
and if properly credentialed and not prohibited by any other law, other
assistive personnel may be identified by the title specific to their training or
education.

(10)
"Restricted physical therapy license" means a license to which
restrictions or conditions, or both, as to scope of practice, place of
practice, supervision of practice, duration of licensed status, or type or
condition of patient or client served are imposed by the board.

(11) "On-site
supervision" means the supervising physical therapist must (a) be
continuously on-site and present in the department or facility where assistive
personnel or holders of interim permits are performing services; (b) be
immediately available to assist the person being supervised in the services
being performed; and (c) maintain continued involvement in appropriate aspects
of each treatment session in which a component of treatment is delegated to
assistive personnel.

Sec. 3. RCW 18.74.012 and 2000 c
171 s 24 are each amended to read as follows:

((Notwithstanding
the provisions of RCW 18.74.010(3),)) A consultation and periodic
review by an authorized health care practitioner is not required for treatment
of neuromuscular or musculoskeletal conditions((: PROVIDED, That a physical
therapist may only provide treatment utilizing orthoses that support, align,
prevent, or correct any structural problems intrinsic to the foot or ankle by
referral or consultation from an authorized health care practitioner)).

NEW SECTION. Sec.
4. (1) It is unlawful for
any person to practice or in any manner hold himself or herself out to practice
physical therapy or designate himself or herself as a physical therapist,
unless he or she is licensed in accordance with this chapter.

(2) This chapter does
not restrict persons licensed under any other law of this state from engaging
in the profession or practice for which they are licensed, if they are not
representing themselves to be physical therapists or providers of physical
therapy.

(3) The following
persons are exempt from licensure as physical therapists under this chapter
when engaged in the following activities:

(a) A person who is
pursuing a course of study leading to a degree as a physical therapist in an
approved professional education program and is satisfying supervised clinical
education requirements related to his or her physical therapy education while
under on-site supervision of a licensed physical therapist;

(b) A physical
therapist while practicing in the United States armed services, United States
public health service, or veterans administration as based on requirements
under federal regulations for state licensure of health care providers; and

(c) A physical
therapist licensed in another United States jurisdiction, or a foreign-educated
physical therapist credentialed in another country, performing physical therapy
as part of teaching or participating in an educational seminar of no more than sixty
days in a calendar year.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
5. (1) No person may
practice or in any manner hold himself or herself out to be engaging in the
practice of physical therapy or designate himself or herself as a physical
therapist unless licensed as a physical therapist in accordance with this
chapter.

(2) A physical
therapist licensed under this chapter is fully authorized to practice physical
therapy as defined in this chapter.

(3) A physical
therapist shall refer persons under his or her care to appropriate health care
practitioners if the physical therapist has reasonable cause to believe
symptoms or conditions are present that require services beyond the scope of
practice or when physical therapy is contraindicated.

(4) Physical therapists
shall adhere to the recognized standards of ethics of the physical therapy
profession and as further established by rule.

(5) A physical
therapist who meets further qualifications as established by rule may penetrate
tissue for the purpose of testing neuromuscular performance.

(6) A physical
therapist may perform wound debridement and wound management that includes, but
is not limited to, sharp debridement, debridement with other agents, dry
dressings, wet dressings, topical agents including enzymes, and hydrotherapy.

(7)(a) A physical
therapist licensed under this chapter may purchase, store, and administer
medications such as hydrocortisone, fluocinonide, fluorimethane, silvadine,
lidocaine magnesium sulfate, zinc oxide, and other similar medications, and may
administer such other drugs or medications as prescribed by a physician. A
pharmacist who dispenses such drugs to a licensed physical therapist is not
liable for any adverse reactions caused by any method of use by the physical therapist.

(b) The secretary,
after consultation with representatives of the physical therapy licensing
board, the board of pharmacy, and the medical quality assurance commission, may
adopt rules that authorize licensed physical therapists to purchase and use
legend drugs and devices in addition to the drugs authorized in this chapter.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
6. (1) Physical therapists
are responsible for patient care given by assistive personnel under their
supervision. A physical therapist may delegate to assistive personnel and
supervise selected acts, tasks, or procedures that fall within the scope of
physical therapy practice but do not exceed the education or training of the
assistive personnel.

(2) Physical therapist
assistants shall at all times be under the supervision of a licensed physical
therapist as further set forth in rule.

(3) Physical therapy
aides and other assistive personnel shall perform patient care activities under
on-site supervision of a licensed physical therapist.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 7. Sections 4 through 6 of
this act are each added to chapter 18.74 RCW.

---
END ---