BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF
WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1. RCW 43.83B.410 and 1989
c 171 s 3 are each amended to read as follows:

Upon the issuance of an
order under RCW 43.83B.405, the department of ecology is empowered to:

(1)(a) Authorize
emergency withdrawal of public surface and ground waters, including dead
storage within reservoirs, on a temporary basis and authorize associated
physical works which may be either temporary or permanent. The termination
date for the authority to make such an emergency withdrawal may not be later
than the termination date of the order issued under RCW 43.83B.405 under which
the power to authorize the withdrawal is established. The department of
ecology may issue such withdrawal authorization when, after investigation and
after providing appropriate federal, state, and local governmental bodies an
opportunity to comment, the following are found:

(i) The waters proposed
for withdrawal are to be used for a beneficial use involving a previously
established activity or purpose;

(ii) The previously
established activity or purpose was furnished water through rights applicable
to the use of a public body of water that cannot be exercised due to the lack
of water arising from natural drought conditions; and

(iii) The proposed
withdrawal will not reduce flows or levels below essential minimums necessary
(A) to assure the maintenance of fisheries requirements through flows or
levels that have been specified prior to the issuance under RCW 43.83B.405 of
the order regarding drought conditions, and (B) to protect federal and
state interests including, among others, power generation, navigation, and
existing water rights. The interests and rights to be protected under this
subsection (1)(a)(iii)(B) are those that have been quantified either through
the issuance of a permit or certificate under this chapter or chapter 90.44 or
90.46 RCW or the filing of a water right claim under chapter 90.14 RCW;

(b) All withdrawal
authorizations issued under this section shall contain provisions that allow
for termination of withdrawals, in whole or in part, whenever withdrawals will
conflict with flows and levels as provided in (a)(iii) of this subsection.
Domestic and irrigation uses of public surface and ground waters shall be given
priority in determining "beneficial uses." As to water withdrawal
and associated works authorized under this subsection, the requirements of
chapter 43.21C RCW and public bidding requirements as otherwise provided by law
are waived and inapplicable. All state and local agencies with authority to
issue permits or other authorizations for such works shall, to the extent
possible, expedite the processing of the permits or authorizations in keeping
with the emergency nature of the requests and shall provide a decision to the applicant
within fifteen calendar days of the date of application. All state departments
or other agencies having jurisdiction over state or other public lands, if such
lands are necessary to effectuate the withdrawal authorizations issued under
this subsection, shall provide short-term easements or other appropriate
property interest upon the payment of the fair market value. This mandate
shall not apply to any lands of the state that are reserved for a special
purpose or use that cannot properly be carried out if the property interest
were conveyed;

(2) Approve a temporary
change in purpose, place of use, or point of diversion, consistent with
existing state policy allowing transfer or lease of waters between willing
parties, as provided for in RCW 90.03.380, 90.03.390, and 90.44.100. However,
compliance with any requirements of (a) notice of newspaper publication of
these sections or (b) the state environmental policy act, chapter 43.21C RCW,
is not required when such changes are necessary to respond to drought
conditions as determined by the department of ecology. An approval of a
temporary change of a water right as authorized under this subsection is not
admissible as evidence in either supporting or contesting the validity of water
claims in State of Washington, Department of Ecology v. Acquavella,
Yakima county superior court number 77-2-01484-5 or any similar proceeding
where the existence of a water right is at issue.

(3) Employ additional
persons for specified terms of time, consistent with the term of a drought
condition, as are necessary to ensure the successful performance of the
activities associated with implementing the emergency drought program of this
chapter.

(4) Revise the drought
contingency plan previously developed by the department; and

(5)
Acquire needed emergency drought-related equipment.

--- END ---