BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF
WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec.
1. The sum of five million
dollars is appropriated for the biennium ending June 30, 2003, from the
emergency reserve fund for deposit in the state drought preparedness account in
response to the emergency caused by a natural disaster and declared a statewide
drought emergency by the governor on March 14, 2001.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
2. The sum of twenty million
dollars is appropriated for the biennium ending June 30, 2003, from the
emergency reserve fund for deposit in the Nisqually earthquake account in
response to the emergency caused by a natural disaster, known as the Nisqually
earthquake, as declared by chapter 5, Laws of 2001, the governor, and the
president of the United States.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 3. This act is necessary for
the immediate preservation of the public peace, health, or safety, or support
of the state government and its existing public institutions, and takes effect
immediately.

---
END ---