BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF
WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec.
1. A new section is added
to chapter 82.04 RCW to read as follows:

(1) The amount of tax
with respect to a qualified grocery distribution cooperative's sales of
groceries or related goods for resale, excluding items subject to tax under RCW
82.04.260(4), to customer-owners of the grocery distribution cooperative is
equal to the gross proceeds of sales of the grocery distribution cooperative
multiplied by the rate of one and one‑half percent.

(2) A qualified grocery
distribution cooperative is allowed a deduction from the gross proceeds of
sales of groceries or related goods for resale, excluding items subject to tax
under RCW 82.04.260(4), to customer-owners of the grocery distribution
cooperative that is equal to the portion of the gross proceeds of sales for
resale that represents the actual cost of the merchandise sold by the grocery
distribution cooperative to customer-owners.

(3) The definitions in
this subsection apply throughout this section unless the context clearly
requires otherwise.

(a) "Grocery
distribution cooperative" means an entity that sells groceries and related
items to customer-owners of the grocery distribution cooperative and has
customer-owners, in the aggregate, who own a majority of the outstanding
ownership interests of the grocery distribution cooperative or of the entity
controlling the grocery distribution cooperative. "Grocery distribution
cooperative" includes an entity that controls a grocery distribution
cooperative.

(b) "Qualified
grocery distribution cooperative" means a grocery distribution cooperative
that has been determined by a court of record of the state of Washington to be
not engaged in wholesaling or making sales at wholesale, within the meaning of
RCW 82.04.270 or any similar provision of a municipal ordinance that imposes a
tax on gross receipts, gross proceeds of sales, or gross income, with respect
to purchases made by customer-owners, and subsequently changes its form of
doing business to make sales at wholesale of groceries or related items to its
customer-owners.

(c)
"Customer-owner" means a person who has an ownership interest in a
grocery distribution cooperative and purchases groceries and related items at
wholesale from that grocery distribution cooperative.

(d) "Controlling"
means holding fifty percent or more of the voting interests of an entity and
having at least equal power to direct or cause the direction of the management
and policies of the entity, whether through the ownership of voting securities,
by contract, or otherwise.

Sec. 2. RCW 82.04.270 and 1999 c
358 s 1 are each amended to read as follows:

Upon every person
except persons taxable under RCW 82.04.260(5) or section 1 of this act
engaging within this state in the business of making sales at wholesale; as to
such persons the amount of tax with respect to such business shall be equal to
the gross proceeds of sales of such business multiplied by the rate of 0.484
percent.

Sec. 3. RCW 82.04.270 and 1999 c
358 s 2 are each amended to read as follows:

Upon every person
except persons taxable under RCW 82.04.260(5), section 1 of this act, or
82.04.272 engaging within this state in the business of making sales at
wholesale; as to such persons the amount of tax with respect to such business
shall be equal to the gross proceeds of sales of such business multiplied by
the rate of 0.484 percent.

Sec. 4. RCW 82.04.290 and 1998 c
331 s 2, 1998 c 312 s 8, and 1998 c 308 s 4 are each reenacted and amended to
read as follows:

(1) Upon every person
engaging within this state in the business of providing international
investment management services, as to such persons, the amount of tax with
respect to such business shall be equal to the gross income or gross proceeds
of sales of the business multiplied by a rate of 0.275 percent.

(2) Upon every person
engaging within this state in any business activity other than or in addition
to those enumerated in RCW 82.04.230, 82.04.240, 82.04.250, 82.04.255,
82.04.260, 82.04.270, section 1 of this act, 82.04.2905, 82.04.280,
82.04.2635, and 82.04.2907, and subsection (1) of this section; as to such
persons the amount of tax on account of such activities shall be equal to the
gross income of the business multiplied by the rate of 1.5 percent.

This section includes,
among others, and without limiting the scope hereof (whether or not title to
materials used in the performance of such business passes to another by
accession, confusion or other than by outright sale), persons engaged in the
business of rendering any type of service which does not constitute a
"sale at retail" or a "sale at wholesale." The value of
advertising, demonstration, and promotional supplies and materials furnished to
an agent by his principal or supplier to be used for informational, educational
and promotional purposes shall not be considered a part of the agent's
remuneration or commission and shall not be subject to taxation under this
section.

Sec. 5. RCW 82.04.290 and 1998 c
343 s 4, 1998 c 331 s 2, 1998 c 312 s 8, and 1998 c 308 s 4 are each reenacted
and amended to read as follows:

(1) Upon every person
engaging within this state in the business of providing international
investment management services, as to such persons, the amount of tax with
respect to such business shall be equal to the gross income or gross proceeds
of sales of the business multiplied by a rate of 0.275 percent.

(2) Upon every person
engaging within this state in any business activity other than or in addition
to those enumerated in RCW 82.04.230, 82.04.240, 82.04.250, 82.04.255,
82.04.260, 82.04.270, section 1 of this act, 82.04.2905, 82.04.280,
82.04.2635, 82.04.2907, and 82.04.272, and subsection (1) of this section; as
to such persons the amount of tax on account of such activities shall be equal
to the gross income of the business multiplied by the rate of 1.5 percent.

This section includes,
among others, and without limiting the scope hereof (whether or not title to
materials used in the performance of such business passes to another by
accession, confusion or other than by outright sale), persons engaged in the
business of rendering any type of service which does not constitute a
"sale at retail" or a "sale at wholesale." The value of
advertising, demonstration, and promotional supplies and materials furnished to
an agent by his principal or supplier to be used for informational, educational
and promotional purposes shall not be considered a part of the agent's
remuneration or commission and shall not be subject to taxation under this
section.

Sec. 6. RCW 82.04.290 and 1998 c
343 s 4, 1998 c 331 s 2, 1998 c 312 s 8, and 1998 c 308 s 5 are each reenacted
and amended to read as follows:

(1) Upon every person
engaging within this state in the business of providing international
investment management services, as to such persons, the amount of tax with
respect to such business shall be equal to the gross income or gross proceeds
of sales of the business multiplied by a rate of 0.275 percent.

(2) Upon every person
engaging within this state in any business activity other than or in addition
to those enumerated in RCW 82.04.230, 82.04.240, 82.04.250, 82.04.255,
82.04.260, 82.04.270, section 1 of this act, 82.04.2905, 82.04.280,
82.04.2907, and 82.04.272, and subsection (1) of this section; as to such
persons the amount of tax on account of such activities shall be equal to the
gross income of the business multiplied by the rate of 1.5 percent.

This section includes,
among others, and without limiting the scope hereof (whether or not title to
materials used in the performance of such business passes to another by
accession, confusion or other than by outright sale), persons engaged in the
business of rendering any type of service which does not constitute a
"sale at retail" or a "sale at wholesale." The value of
advertising, demonstration, and promotional supplies and materials furnished to
an agent by his principal or supplier to be used for informational, educational
and promotional purposes shall not be considered a part of the agent's
remuneration or commission and shall not be subject to taxation under this
section.

Sec. 7. RCW 82.19.050 and 2001 c
118 s 7 are each amended to read as follows:

The litter tax imposed
in this chapter does not apply to:

(1) The manufacture or
sale of products for use and consumption outside the state; ((or))

(2) The value of
products or gross proceeds of the sales exempt from tax under RCW 82.04.330;
or

(3) The sale of
products for resale by a qualified grocery distribution cooperative to
customer-owners of the grocery distribution cooperative. For the purposes of
this section, "qualified grocery distribution cooperative" and
"customer-owner" have the meanings given in section 1 of this act.

Sec. 8. RCW 82.19.050 and 1992 c
175 s 7 are each amended to read as follows:

The litter tax imposed
in this chapter does not apply to:

(1) The manufacture or
sale of products for use and consumption outside the state; ((or))

(2) The value of
products or gross proceeds of the sales of any animal, bird, or insect or the
milk, eggs, wool, fur, meat, honey, or other substance obtained therefrom, if
the person performs only the growing or raising function of such animal, bird,
or insect; or

(3) The sale of
products for resale by a qualified grocery distribution cooperative to customer-owners
of the grocery distribution cooperative. For the purposes of this section,
"qualified grocery distribution cooperative" and
"customer-owner" have the meanings given in section 1 of this act.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
9. (1) Sections 1, 2, 4, and
8 of this act are necessary for the immediate preservation of the public peace,
health, or safety, or support of the state government and its existing public
institutions, and take effect immediately.

(2) Sections 3 and 5 of
this act are necessary for the immediate preservation of the public peace,
health, or safety, or support of the state government and its existing public
institutions, and take effect July 1, 2001.

(3) Section 6 of this
act takes effect July 1, 2003.

(4) Section 7 is
necessary for the immediate preservation of the public peace, health, or
safety, or support of the state government and its existing public
institutions, and takes effect July 22, 2001.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
10. (1) Sections 2 and 4 of
this act expire July 1, 2001.

(2) Section 5 of this
act expires July 1, 2003.

(3) Section 8 of this
act expires July 22, 2001.