BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF
WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1. RCW 82.04.324 and 1995
2nd sp.s. c 9 s 3 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) As used in this
section:

(a) "Blood"
includes human whole blood, plasma, blood derivatives, and related products.

(b) "Bone"
includes human bone, bone marrow, and related products.

(c) "Tissue"
includes human musculoskeletal tissue, musculoskeletal tissue derivatives, and
related products.

(d) "Blood, bone,
or tissue bank" means an organization exempt from federal income tax under
section 501(c)(3) of the federal internal revenue code, organized solely for
the purpose of performing research on, procuring, testing, processing, storing,
packaging, distributing, or using blood, bone, or tissue.

(e) "Medical
supplies" means any item of tangible personal property, including any
repair and replacement parts for such tangible personal property, used by a
blood, tissue, or bone bank for the purpose of performing research on,
procuring, testing, processing, storing, packaging, distributing, or using
blood, bone, or tissue. The term includes tangible personal property used to:

(i) Provide preparatory
treatment of blood, bone, or tissue;

(ii) Control, guide,
measure, tune, verify, align, regulate, test, or physically support blood,
bone, or tissue; and

(iii) Protect the
health and safety of employees or others present during research on, procuring,
testing, processing, storing, packaging, distributing, or using blood, bone, or
tissue.

(f)
"Chemical" means any catalyst, solvent, water, acid, oil, or other
additive that physically or chemically interacts with blood, bone, or tissue.

(g)
"Materials" means any item of tangible personal property, including,
but not limited to, bags, packs, collecting sets, filtering materials, testing
reagents, antisera, and refrigerants used or consumed in performing research
on, procuring, testing, processing, storing, packaging, distributing, or using
blood, bone, or tissue.

(h)
"Research" means basic and applied research that has as its objective
the design, development, refinement, testing, marketing, or commercialization
of a product, service, or process.

(i) "Organ
procurement entity" means an organization that is exempt from federal
income tax under section 501(c)(3) of the federal internal revenue code and
that lawfully procures human organs under applicable state and federal laws for
the purpose of transplanting the same into humans.

(j) "Human
organ" means a human body part that is necessary for the human body to
function, a kidney, heart, lung, liver, pancreas, bone marrow, bone, skin, cornea,
and eye.

(2) This chapter does
not apply to amounts received by organ procurement entities for all
appropriate and necessary organ procurement and transplanting activities or
blood, bone, or tissue banks, to the extent the amounts are exempt from federal
income tax.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
2. This act is necessary for
the immediate preservation of the public peace, health, or safety, or support
of the state government and its existing public institutions, and takes effect
immediately.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 3. This act applies
retroactively to January 1, 1994.

---
END ---