BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF
WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec.
1. A new section is added
to chapter 71.24 RCW to read as follows:

(1) The department, in
collaboration with a work group appointed by the secretary and made up of
consumers, advocates, service providers, and representatives of regional
support networks, shall develop performance measures for use in evaluating and
managing the community mental health service delivery system authorized under
this chapter. The performance measures shall be consistent with the provisions
of RCW 71.24.405(3) which may include but are not limited to:

(a) Access to services;

(b) Quality and appropriateness
of care;

(c) Outcome measures;
including, but not limited to:

(i) Consumer change
over time;

(ii) Consumer
perception of hope for the future;

(iii) Percent of
consumers who have safe and stable housing;

(iv) Percent of adults
employed for one or more days in the last thirty days;

(v) Percent of
consumers without a jail or detention stay;

(vi) Percent of
available school days attended in the past thirty days;

(vii) Percent of
consumers without a psychiatric hospitalization; and

(d) Structure and plan
management.

(2) The department
shall require that service providers and regional support networks collect
uniform performance measure information and report it to the department
regularly. The department shall develop benchmarks that compare performance
measure information from all regional support networks and providers to provide
a clear indication of the most effective regional support networks and
providers. Benchmark information shall be published quarterly and provided to
the legislature, the governor, regional support networks, and all providers of
mental health services.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
2. A new section is added
to chapter 71.24 RCW to read as follows:

Every regional support
network and mental health services provider shall be evaluated using the
criteria in section 1 of this act.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
3. A new section is added
to chapter 71.24 RCW to read as follows:

The department shall
provide a report to the appropriate committees of the legislature on the
development, implementation, and achievement of the performance measures by
regional support networks and service providers on an annual basis, no later
than June 30th of each year, beginning in 2002. The report shall include how
the department is using the outcome measure information obtained under section
1 of this act to manage the community mental health service delivery system.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 4. If specific funding for
the purposes of this act, referencing this act by bill or chapter number, is
not provided by June 30, 2001, in the omnibus appropriations act, this act is
null and void.

---
END ---