BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF
WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1. RCW 15.65.270 and 1984 c
287 s 16 are each amended to read as follows:

In the event of a
vacancy on the board, the remaining members shall select a qualified person to
fill the unexpired term. A majority of the voting members of the board shall
constitute a quorum for the transaction of all business and the carrying out of
all duties of the board. Each member of the board shall be compensated in
accordance with RCW 43.03.230 ((and shall)). Members and employees
of the board may be reimbursed for actual travel expenses incurred
in carrying out the provisions of this chapter, as defined under the commodity
board's marketing order. Otherwise, if not defined or referenced in the
marketing order, reimbursement for travel expenses shall be at the rates
allowed state employees in accordance with RCW 43.03.050 and 43.03.060.

Sec. 2. RCW 15.66.130 and 1984 c
287 s 17 are each amended to read as follows:

Each commodity
commission shall hold such regular meetings as the marketing order may
prescribe or that the commission by resolution may prescribe, together with
such special meetings that may be called in accordance with provisions of its
resolutions upon reasonable notice to all members thereof. A majority of the
members shall constitute a quorum for the transaction of all business of the
commission. In the event of a vacancy in an elected or appointed position on
the commission, the remaining elected members of the commission shall select a
qualified person to fill the unexpired term.

Each
member of the commission shall be compensated in accordance with RCW 43.03.230
((and shall)). Members and employees of the commission may be
reimbursed for actual travel expenses incurred in carrying out the
provisions of this chapter, as defined under the commodity board's marketing
order. Otherwise, if not defined or referenced in the marketing order,
reimbursement for travel expenses shall be in accordance with RCW 43.03.050
and 43.03.060.

---
END ---