BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF
WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec.
1. A new section is added
to chapter 47.01 RCW to read as follows:

It is the intent of the
legislature to create an independent and objective transportation
accountability board to establish performance measures and benchmarks to ensure
transportation system performance at all levels of government.

The mission of the
transportation accountability board is to implement the recommendations of the
Blue Ribbon Commission on Transportation regarding the adoption of
transportation benchmarks as a cornerstone of government accountability at the
state, city, county, and transit district levels. The legislature embraces
that recommendation. Monitoring performance of the system and measuring
results will be the basis for all transportation strategies.

The transportation
accountability board shall develop a strategy and implement a plan for a
performance measurement system. The system must include data gathering,
analysis, development of recommendations, monitoring the implementation of
recommendations, and a process for reporting transportation system performance
to the governor's office, the legislature, and the public.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
2. A new section is added
to chapter 47.01 RCW to read as follows:

(1) The transportation
accountability board is created.

(2) The board is
composed of five members, appointed by the governor with the advice and consent
of the senate for terms of four years, except that two members initially will
be appointed for terms of two years. Members should have transportation
experience in management, operations, planning, budgeting, project management,
or performance measurement.

(3) The governor may
not remove members from the board before the expiration of their terms unless
for cause based upon a determination of incapacity, incompetence, neglect of
duty, or malfeasance in office by the Thurston county superior court, upon
petition and show cause proceedings brought for that purpose in that court and
directed to the board member in question.

(4) No member may be
appointed for more than three consecutive terms.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
3. A new section is added
to chapter 47.01 RCW to read as follows:

(1) The board shall
meet periodically upon the call of its chair. It may adopt its own rules and
may establish its own procedures. It shall act collectively in harmony with
recorded resolutions or motions adopted by a majority vote of the members.

(2) The board shall
elect one of its members as the chair for a term of two years. The chair may
vote on all matters before the board.

(3) Each member of the
board will be compensated in accordance with RCW 43.03.250 and reimbursed for
actual necessary traveling and other expenses in going to, attending, and
returning from meetings of the board or that are incurred in the discharge of
duties requested by the chair. However, in no event may a board member be
compensated in any year for more than one hundred twenty days, except the chair
of the board may be compensated for not more than one hundred fifty days.
Service on the board does not qualify as a service credit for the purposes of a
public retirement system.

(4) The board shall
keep proper records and is subject to audit by the state auditor.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
4. A new section is added
to chapter 47.01 RCW to read as follows:

(1) The board, at its
option, may either appoint a professional administrator, who will serve at its
pleasure and whose salary will be set by the board, or make provisions ensuring
these responsibilities are carried out by the legislative evaluation and
accountability program personnel. Staff support to the board must be provided
by the legislative evaluation and accountability program, which shall provide
professional support for the duties, functions, responsibilities, and
activities of the board, including but not limited to information technology
systems; data collection, processing, analysis, and reporting; project
management; and office space, equipment, and secretarial support.

(2) The board may from
time to time retain planners, consultants, and other technical personnel to
advise it in the performance of its duties.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
5. A new section is added
to chapter 47.01 RCW to read as follows:

(1) The transportation
accountability board shall serve as a single, independent, statewide point of
accountability for reporting, analyzing, and monitoring the performance of an
integrated transportation system. The board has the following responsibilities:

(a) Develop performance
measures for the transportation system for the purposes enumerated in section 1
of this act;

(b) Implement and
oversee the attainment of benchmarks and performance measures that have been
adopted by the board;

(c) Report biennially
to the governor and the legislature on progress toward achieving recommended
reforms and efficiencies, and make policy recommendations for furthering
progress toward achieving optimal transportation system performance;

(d) Monitor and report
the efforts at the state, city, county, and transit district levels on adopting
leading edge transportation strategies.

(2) The board must be
given timely access, upon written request of the administrator, to all machine
readable, printed, and other data of state agencies relative to transportation
expenditures, budgets, and related fiscal matters.

(3) In developing the
benchmarks and performance measures, the board shall solicit input from cities,
counties, transit districts, state agencies, transportation stakeholders, and
the public. The board shall report back to the legislature on the adopted
benchmarks and performance measures by December 15, 2001.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
6. A new section is added
to chapter 47.01 RCW to read as follows:

By December 15th of
each even-numbered year, the transportation accountability board shall prepare
and submit to the house and senate standing committees on transportation and
the office of financial management, a comprehensive statewide report on
transportation systems at the state, county, city, and transit district levels,
measuring each system's performance and progress in achieving the benchmarks
and performance measures adopted by the board under section 5 of this act.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
7. A new section is added
to chapter 47.01 RCW to read as follows:

The board shall
cooperate, act, and function with Washington state legislative committees and
may cooperate with the councils or committees of other states similar to this
board and with other interstate research organizations.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
8. A new section is added
to chapter 44.48 RCW to read as follows:

To carry out section 5
of this act, the legislative evaluation and accountability program shall
provide staff support to the transportation accountability board for:

(1) Automated data
bases and application systems in support of board requirements to monitor,
evaluate, analyze, report, and review;

(2) Maintenance of
computer software, application programs, data bases, and related documentation;

(3) Education,
training, and programming services;

(4) Procedural
documentation support;

(5) Consulting
assistance on special projects; and

(6) Any other staff
assistance or use of facilities and equipment that is necessary for the board
to carry out its duties.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
9. A new section is added
to chapter 43.105 RCW to read as follows:

The transportation
accountability board is expressly exempt from this chapter.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
10. This act shall be known
as the Transportation Accountability Act of 2001.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 11. This act is necessary for
the immediate preservation of the public peace, health, or safety, or support
of the state government and its existing public institutions, and takes effect
immediately.

---
END ---