BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF
WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec.
1. INTENT. The legislature intends
to continue to follow the findings and intent in RCW 28A.655.005.

Sec. 2. RCW 28A.655.030 and 1999
c 388 s 102 are each amended to read as follows:

The powers and duties
of the academic achievement and accountability commission shall include, but
are not limited to the following:

(1) For purposes of
statewide accountability, the commission shall:

(a) Adopt and revise:

(i) Performance
improvement goals in reading, writing, science, and mathematics by subject and
grade level as the commission deems appropriate to improve student learning,
once assessments in these subjects are required statewide((. The goals
shall be in addition to any goals adopted in RCW 28A.655.050. The commission
may also revise any goal adopted in RCW 28A.655.050));

(ii) Goals for
dropout rates and reduction of dropout rates for middle schools, junior high
schools, and high schools, once common definitions are developed;

(iii) Goals designed
to accelerate the achievement of students who are disproportionately
academically underachieving.

The commission shall
adopt the goals by rule. However, before each goal is implemented, the
commission shall present the goal to the education committees of the house of
representatives and the senate for the committees' review and comment in a time
frame that will permit the legislature to take statutory action on the goal if
such action is deemed warranted by the legislature;

(b) Identify the scores
students must achieve in order to meet the standard on the Washington
assessment of student learning and determine student scores that identify
levels of student performance below and beyond the standard. The commission
shall set such performance standards and levels in consultation with the
superintendent of public instruction and after consideration of any
recommendations that may be developed by any advisory committees that may be
established for this purpose;

(c) Adopt objective,
systematic criteria to identify successful schools and school districts and
recommend to the superintendent of public instruction schools and districts to
be recognized for two types of accomplishments, student achievement and
improvements in student achievement. Recognition for improvements in student
achievement shall include consideration of one or more of the following
accomplishments:

(i) An increase in the
percent of students meeting standards. The level of achievement required for
recognition may be based on the achievement goals established by the
legislature under RCW 28A.655.050 and the commission under (a) of this
subsection;

(ii) Positive progress
on an improvement index that measures improvement in all levels of the
assessment; and

(iii) Improvements
despite challenges such as high levels of mobility, poverty, English as a second
language learners, and large numbers of students in special populations as
measured by either the percent of students meeting the standard, or the
improvement index.

When determining the
baseline year or years for recognizing individual schools, the commission may
use the assessment results from the initial years the assessments were
administered, if doing so with individual schools would be appropriate;

(d) Adopt objective,
systematic criteria to identify schools and school districts in need of focused
assistance ((and those in which)) due to significant numbers of
students persistently failing to meet state standards. In its
deliberations, the commission shall ((consider the use of all)) use
the statewide mandated criterion-referenced and norm-referenced
standardized tests as follows:

(i) Beginning in
2001, the reading and math assessments at the elementary school level;

(ii) Beginning in
2004, the reading and math assessments at the elementary, middle or junior high
and high school levels;

(e) Identify schools
and school districts in which state intervention ((measures)) strategies
will be needed ((and a range of appropriate intervention strategies)),
beginning no earlier than ((June 30, 2001, and after the legislature has
authorized a set of intervention strategies)) November 1, 2002.
Beginning no earlier than ((June 30, 2001, and after the legislature has
authorized a set of intervention strategies, at the request of)) November
1, 2002, the superintendent of public instruction may recommend and the
commission((,)) may approve that the superintendent shall
intervene in the school or school district and ((take corrective actions.
This chapter does not provide additional authority for the commission or the
superintendent of public instruction to intervene in a school or school
district)) implement state intervention strategies;

(f) Adopt a student
performance and improvement threshold for use in evaluating progress under
focused assistance and intervention. The threshold shall be based on each
school's progress toward all performance improvement goals adopted under (a)(i)
of this subsection and a minimum percentile score, as adopted by the
commission, on statewide mandated norm-referenced standardized tests;

(g) Identify
performance incentive systems that have improved or have the potential to
improve student achievement;

(((g))) (h)
Annually review the assessment reporting system to ensure fairness, accuracy,
timeliness, and equity of opportunity, especially with regard to schools with
special circumstances and unique populations of students, and ((a
recommendation)) recommend to the superintendent of public
instruction ((of)) any improvements needed to the system;

(((h))) (i)
Annually report by December 1st to the legislature, the governor, the
superintendent of public instruction, and the state board of education on the
progress, findings, and recommendations of the commission. The report may
include recommendations of actions to help improve student achievement;

(((i))) (j)
By December 1, 2000, and by December 1st annually thereafter, report to the
education committees of the house of representatives and the senate on the
progress that has been made in achieving the reading goal under RCW 28A.655.050
and any additional goals adopted by the commission;

(((j))) (k)
Coordinate its activities with the state board of education and the office of
the superintendent of public instruction;

(((k))) (l)
Seek advice from the public and all interested educational organizations in the
conduct of its work; ((and

(l))) (m) Establish advisory committees,
which may include persons who are not members of the commission; and

(n) Develop and
analyze any data or information necessary to perform its accountability
responsibilities;

(2) Holding meetings
and public hearings, which may include regional meetings and hearings;

(3) Hiring necessary
staff and determining the staff's duties and compensation. However, the office
of the superintendent of public instruction shall provide staff support to the
commission until the commission has hired its own staff, and shall provide most
of the technical assistance and logistical support needed by the commission
thereafter. The office of the superintendent of public instruction shall be
the fiscal agent for the commission. The commission may direct the office of
the superintendent of public instruction to enter into subcontracts, within the
commission's resources, with school districts, teachers, higher education
faculty, state agencies, business organizations, and other individuals and
organizations to assist the commission in its deliberations; ((and))

(4) Receiving per diem
and travel allowances as permitted under RCW 43.03.050 and 43.03.060; and

(5) Adopting the
criteria and standards in subsection (1)(b), (c), and (d) of this section in
accordance with RCW 34.05.010(16) and the procedures in RCW 34.05.310 through
34.05.395. The commission shall seek review and comment from the education
committees of the house of representatives and senate before adoption.

Sec. 3. RCW 28A.655.100 and 1999
c 388 s 302 are each amended to read as follows:

Each school district
board of directors shall adopt and revise, as appropriate, district-wide and
school-level plans to achieve the performance improvement goals under RCW
28A.655.030 and shall:

(1)(a) Annually report
to parents and to the community in a public meeting and annually report in
writing the following information:

(i) District-wide and
school-level performance improvement goals;

(ii) Student
performance relative to the goals; and

(iii) District-wide and
school-level plans to achieve the goals, including curriculum and instruction,
parental or guardian involvement, and resources available to parents and
guardians to help students meet the state standards;

(b) Report annually in
a news release to the local media the district's progress toward meeting the
district-wide and school-level goals; and

(c) Include the
school-level goals, student performance relative to the goals, and a summary of
school-level plans to achieve the goals in each school's annual school
performance report under RCW 28A.655.110. The district also shall include
this information on the district's internet web site. The office of the
superintendent of public instruction shall provide a link on its web site to
the school district's web site.

(2) School districts in
which ten or fewer students in the district or in a school in the district are
eligible to be assessed in a grade level are not required to report numerical
improvement goals and performance relative to the goals, but are required to
report to parents and the community their plans to improve student achievement.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
4. SUPERINTENDENT OF PUBLIC
INSTRUCTION DUTIES. (1) The superintendent of public instruction, based on the
criteria established by the academic achievement and accountability commission,
shall annually analyze student assessment results. The analysis shall include,
but need not be limited to, consideration of the levels of achievement and
levels of improvement on criterion-referenced and norm-referenced assessments
required to meet goals and achievement levels determined by the academic
achievement and accountability commission. The purposes of the analysis shall
be:

(a) To identify
successful schools and school districts, based on criteria adopted by the
commission under RCW 28A.655.030;

(b) To identify schools
in need of focused assistance, based on criteria adopted by the commission
under RCW 28A.655.030; and

(c) After November 1,
2002, to help the superintendent of public instruction identify schools and
school districts in which more intensive state intervention may be needed.

(2) Annually by October
15th, based on the results of the analysis in subsection (1)(b) of this
section, the superintendent of public instruction shall recommend to the
commission and the commission shall determine which schools shall be
prioritized as having the highest need for focused assistance.

(3) The superintendent
of public instruction shall provide the commission with available data in a
timely manner, including raw student data, and other information the commission
deems appropriate in pursuit of the fulfillment of its responsibility to
provide oversight and monitoring of the state's educational accountability
system.

(4) To the extent funds
are appropriated for this specific purpose, the superintendent of public
instruction shall make available to schools information on models of excellence
in instruction, management, capacity building, parent involvement, and other
research-based strategies to improve student achievement.

(5) The superintendent
of public instruction shall report annually to the legislative committees on
education regarding the implementation of the performance agreements and
intervention plans, including any barriers to improving student learning that
school districts have encountered.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
5. FOCUSED ASSISTANCE
PROCESS. (1) If a school is prioritized as having the highest need for focused
assistance under section 4(2) of this act, annually by November 1st, the
superintendent of public instruction shall notify the school district within
which the school is located of such eligibility.

(2) The superintendent
of public instruction, in cooperation with the school district in which the
school is located, shall oversee the following process:

(a) The superintendent
of public instruction or the superintendent's designee, in cooperation with the
district, shall convene a team of experts to conduct an educational audit of
the school. The educational audit shall include but need not be limited to:

(i) An evaluation of
the things that are working well in the school and those that need
reexamination and redirection;

(ii) Resources
available to the school, the use of those resources, and how current funds can
be used more effectively;

(iii) The relationship
of the school to its local district, parents, and the community;

(iv) The curriculum and
instructional materials available and the extent to which those materials are
aligned with the state's essential academic learning requirements;

(v) The roles and
contributions of the school's employees, and the levels of experience and
subject matter expertise, including endorsements, of the school's certificated
employees;

(vi) The needs and
characteristics of the school's students, including student mobility and
poverty indicators; attendance rates; dropout and graduation rates, if
applicable and available; posthigh school indicators, if applicable and
available; and the percent of students in special programs;

(vii) School district
management practices;

(viii) School climate
and safety indicators; and

(ix) Other barriers to
student learning.

(b) The superintendent
of public instruction, or the superintendent's designee, shall formally present
the findings of the educational audit to the school district board of
directors, and shall share the results with the academic achievement and
accountability commission.

(c) The school directors
shall hold a public meeting to inform parents, teachers, staff, and the local
community of the findings of the educational audit, and to solicit input on
ways to address the issues identified.

(d) Based on the
results of the educational audit and input from parents, teachers, staff, and
the community, a team of school employees and the principal that is convened by
the school district in cooperation with the superintendent of public
instruction or the superintendent of public instruction's designee shall
develop a comprehensive school improvement plan within one hundred twenty days
of being notified by the superintendent of public instruction of focused
assistance eligibility. The plan shall address items identified in the
educational audit and shall include, but not be limited to, the following:

(i) Student performance
goals and expectations;

(ii) How existing funds
will be used more effectively;

(iii) How identified
barriers to student learning will be addressed;

(iv) What actions are
needed to assist the school;

(v) Who is responsible
for implementing the specific actions in the plan;

(vi) Whether students
attending the school should have the choice of transferring to other public
schools in the district, and whether this choice includes free bus
transportation; and

(vii) Whether waivers
of state laws or local policies and agreements are needed. Waiver provisions
in existence before January 1, 2001, are to be used to obtain the waivers,
under an expedited decision-making process if necessary.

(e) The superintendent
of public instruction, or the superintendent's designee, and the school
district shall jointly negotiate the terms of a performance agreement to
address the issues identified in the educational audit and to implement the
school improvement plan. The agreement shall be developed in consultation with
the school's staff and parents. In addition to the items addressed in the
school improvement plan, the performance agreements shall include, but not be
limited to, a description of:

(i) How additional
focused assistance resources, if any, will be used;

(ii) What actions the
district will take to assist the school;

(iii) Who is
responsible for implementing the specific actions in the agreement; and

(iv) Measurable
benchmarks for actions in the performance agreement with a timeline for
completion.

(f) The school
directors shall hold a public hearing to inform parents, teachers, staff, and
the local community about the school improvement plan and the terms of the
performance agreement.

(g) If the
superintendent of public instruction determines that the school district is
failing to complete the process in a timely fashion or is failing to conduct
the process in good faith, the superintendent of public instruction shall
recommend to the academic achievement and accountability commission that
intervention strategies be imposed.

(h) The duration of a
performance agreement shall be two school years.

(i) Before final
adoption, the performance agreement shall be submitted to the academic
achievement and accountability commission in a time frame that permits the
commission to make recommendations for modifications to the terms of the
agreement.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
6. FOCUSED ASSISTANCE
OPTIONS AND ACTIONS. (1) Focused assistance, as outlined in this chapter,
shall be available to a school district on behalf of an eligible school to
complete an educational audit, develop a school improvement plan, and implement
a performance agreement. Focused assistance for performance agreement
implementation may not be provided to a school district in a given academic year
unless the agreement is approved within one hundred eighty calendar days of the
date the district is notified by the superintendent of public instruction of
focused assistance eligibility. Assistance may be obtained from third parties,
such as personnel from colleges or universities, independent contractors,
statewide education organizations, and educational service districts.

(2) Focused assistance
options and actions available to the school, school district, and
superintendent of public instruction in a performance agreement may include,
but are not limited to:

(a) Changes in the
school's curriculum and instructional practices, including implementing a whole
school reform model;

(b) Staff
collaboration, planning, and training;

(c) New or revised instructional
materials;

(d) Supplemental
contracts subject to RCW 28A.400.200(4);

(e) Extended learning
opportunities for students;

(f) Providing students
attending the school with the choice of transferring to other public schools in
the district;

(g) Revising school
district personnel assignments;

(h) Reallocation of
financial resources;

(i) Increasing fiscal
flexibility at the school site;

(j) Hiring a short-term
principal-teacher replacement team that would provide free time for the
principal and teachers for staff collaboration, planning, and training;

(k) Restructuring of
the management, budget, organization, and instructional or programmatic
approaches;

(l) Any other action
authorized by law that the superintendent of public instruction deems necessary
to improve student learning.

(3) In a class I school
district, the parent or guardian of a student in a school identified for
focused assistance may enroll the student in a different public school in the
district. Each class I school district shall adopt a policy allowing the
automatic intradistrict release and acceptance of students from schools that
are in focused assistance under this section. If the school district board of
directors determines that the automatic intradistrict transfer of a student
under this section is an undue hardship, the school district may appeal that
intradistrict transfer to the state board of education.

(4) The superintendent
of public instruction may use focused assistance funds to assist a school if
the superintendent of public instruction finds that funds currently available
to the school are being used effectively, or will be reallocated to be used
effectively under the terms of the performance agreement.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
7. EVALUATION AND
INTERVENTION. (1) The superintendent of public instruction, or the
superintendent's designee, shall analyze the implementation of a performance
agreement after the agreement has been in effect for one year. Upon
completion, the superintendent shall provide the analysis to the school
district and academic achievement and accountability commission. The focus of
the analysis shall be the degree to which implementation benchmarks and
timelines in the agreement have been met.

(2) Two years after a
performance agreement is approved, the superintendent of public instruction
shall evaluate progress on the performance agreement implementation benchmarks
and the degree to which students in the school have met or exceeded the student
performance expectations described in the agreement. The superintendent of
public instruction shall provide the analysis to the school district and
academic achievement and accountability commission.

(3) Based on the
results of the evaluation, the superintendent of public instruction shall
recommend, and the commission shall approve, whether the performance agreement
shall be:

(a) Ended because the
agreement was successfully completed. An agreement is successfully completed
when one of the following criteria is met:

(i) The school, for two
years, has successfully met or exceeded the student performance and improvement
threshold as established by the academic achievement and accountability
commission under RCW 28A.655.030; or

(ii) The school has
made sufficient progress on the performance agreement;

(b) Extended with
existing or newly negotiated conditions; or

(c) Replaced with an
intervention plan. The superintendent of public instruction shall recommend
the implementation of an intervention plan if the superintendent finds that the
school district and school are making insufficient progress in improving
student learning or insufficient progress in implementation of the performance agreement.

(4) The superintendent
of public instruction shall formally notify the school directors of the
district of the results of the evaluation and the superintendent's
recommendations to the commission.

(5) When the academic
achievement and accountability commission has approved the superintendent of
public instruction's recommendation to replace a performance agreement with an
intervention plan:

(a) The superintendent
of public instruction shall write, revise as necessary, and oversee the
implementation of an intervention plan that may contain any action authorized
by law that the superintendent of public instruction deems necessary to improve
student learning;

(b) The school district
shall implement each component of the intervention plan and report at least
annually to parents, the community, the academic achievement and accountability
commission, and the superintendent of public instruction on the district's
progress in raising student achievement and on the implementation of the
intervention plan; and

(c) The superintendent
of public instruction shall recommend and the commission shall approve whether
the school district shall be released from the intervention plan when any of
the following criteria are met:

(i) The school, for two
consecutive years, has successfully met or exceeded the student performance and
improvement threshold as established by the academic achievement and
accountability commission under RCW 28A.655.030; or

(ii) The school has
made sufficient progress on the intervention plan.

(6) In a class I school
district, the parent or guardian of a student in a school under intervention
may enroll the student in a different public school in the district. Each
class I school district shall adopt a policy allowing the automatic intradistrict
release and acceptance of students from schools that are in intervention under
this section. If the school district board of directors determines that the
automatic intradistrict transfer of a student under this section is an undue
hardship, the school district may appeal that intradistrict transfer to the
state board of education.

(7) One year after a
school district has been released from an intervention plan, the school
district shall report to the superintendent of public instruction on the district's
progress in continuing to improve student achievement.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
8. REPORT ON INTERVENTIONS.
By November 30, 2002, the academic achievement and accountability commission
shall analyze and report to the governor and the legislative education
committees on the intervention strategies used by other states and nations,
including the success of those strategies in improving student achievement.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
9. CAPTIONS NOT LAW.
Captions used in this act are not any part of the law.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
10. Sections 4 through 7 of
this act are each added to chapter 28A.655 RCW.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
11. If any provision of this
act or its application to any person or circumstance is held invalid, the
remainder of the act or the application of the provision to other persons or
circumstances is not affected.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
12. RCW 28A.655.050 (Reading
goals--Mathematics goals) and 1999 c 388 s 201 & 1998 c 319 s 101 are each
repealed.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 13. This act is necessary for
the immediate preservation of the public peace, health, or safety, or support
of the state government and its existing public institutions, and takes effect
immediately.

---
END ---