BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF
WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec.
1. (1) The sum of three
hundred fifty thousand dollars, or as much thereof as may be necessary, is
appropriated for the fiscal year ending June 30, 2002, from the general fund to
the department of ecology solely for the study described in subsection (4) of this
section.

(2) The sum of three
hundred fifty thousand dollars, or as much thereof as may be necessary, is
appropriated for the fiscal year ending June 30, 2003, from the general fund to
the department of ecology solely for the study described in subsection (4) of
this section.

(3) The sum of three
hundred thousand dollars, or as much thereof as may be necessary, is
appropriated for the biennium ending June 30, 2003, from the water quality
account to the department of ecology solely for the study described in
subsection (4) of this section.

(4) The
appropriations made by this section are provided to the department of ecology
for a ground water study in the Yakima basin. In providing funding for this
study, the legislature is not acquiescing in any determination or hypothesis of
any party regarding the hydraulic continuity of the ground waters in the Yakima
river basin with the surface water flows of the Yakima river or its
tributaries, and the legislature is not acquiescing in any determination or hypothesis
of any party regarding state or federal jurisdiction over the ground water
resources in the Yakima basin.

---
END ---