BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF
WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec.
1. The legislature finds
that in some areas of the state the stability of the electrical transmission
and distribution system depends on the consistent on-peak and off-peak load
provided by large consumers of electrical power. The legislature finds that
the increases in electrical rates threaten the business viability of these
essential facilities. The tax exemptions in this act are intended to improve
the business viability of these facilities so they can continue this vital
service to the state.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
2. A new section is added
to chapter 82.04 RCW to read as follows:

(1) This chapter does
not apply with respect to the gross income of the business proceeding or
accruing from production activity at a qualified smelter facility. For the
purposes of this section, "qualified smelter facility" means a
smelter which produces, or has produced, aluminum or magnesium where the direct
current consumed is less than 6.5 kilowatt hours per pound of manufactured
product.

(2) This section
expires July 1, 2003.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
3. A new section is added
to chapter 82.08 RCW to read as follows:

(1) A person who has
paid tax under RCW 82.08.020 for tangible personal property used at a qualified
smelter facility, or for services rendered with respect to structures and
tangible personal property used at a qualified smelter facility, is eligible
for an exemption from state tax in the form of a remittance, as provided in
this section. A person claiming an exemption must pay the tax and may then
apply to the department for remittance of retail sales tax paid under RCW
82.08.020. For the purposes of this section, "qualified smelter
facility" has the meaning given in section 2 of this act.

(2) This section
expires July 1, 2003.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
4. A new section is added
to chapter 82.12 RCW to read as follows:

(1) A person who has
paid tax under RCW 82.12.020 for tangible personal property used at a qualified
smelter facility is eligible for an exemption from state tax in the form of a
remittance, as provided in this section. A person claiming an exemption must
pay the tax and may then apply to the department for remittance of tax paid
under RCW 82.12.020. For the purposes of this section, "qualified smelter
facility" has the meaning given in section 2 of this act.

(2) This section
expires July 1, 2003.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
5. A new section is added
to chapter 84.36 RCW to read as follows:

(1) Real and personal
property used directly in the operation of a qualified smelter facility is
exempt from property taxes levied for any state purpose. For the purposes of
this section, "qualified smelter facility" has the meaning given in
section 2 of this act.

(2) This section
expires January 1, 2004.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
6. Section 5 of this act
applies to taxes levied for collection in 2002 and 2003.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 7. This act takes effect
August 1, 2001.

---
END ---