BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF
WASHINGTON:

PART I

EXECUTIVE APPOINTMENT OF THE DOT
SECRETARY

AND ESTABLISHMENT OF A
TRANSPORTATION

ACCOUNTABILITY BOARD

NEW SECTION. Sec.
1. LEGISLATIVE INTENT. It is the intent of the
legislature to establish policy goals for the operation, performance of, and
investment in, the state's transportation system. The policy goals shall
consist of the following benchmark categories, adopted by the state's blue
ribbon commission on transportation on November 30, 2000. In addition to
improving safety, public investments in transportation shall support
achievement of these and other priority goals:

No interstate highways,
state routes, and local arterials shall be in poor condition; no bridges shall
be structurally deficient, and safety retrofits shall be performed on those
state bridges at the highest seismic risk levels; traffic congestion on urban
state highways shall be significantly reduced and be no worse than the national
mean; delay per driver shall be significantly reduced and no worse than the
national mean; per capita vehicle miles traveled shall be maintained at 2000
levels; the nonauto share of commuter trips shall be increased in urban areas;
administrative costs as a percentage of transportation spending shall achieve
the most efficient quartile nationally; and the state's public transit agencies
shall achieve the median cost per vehicle revenue hour of peer transit
agencies, adjusting for the regional cost-of-living.

These policy goals
shall be the basis for establishment of detailed and measurable performance
benchmarks.

It is also the intent
of the legislature to create an independent and objective transportation
accountability board to establish performance measures and benchmarks to ensure
transportation system performance at all levels of government.

The mission of the
transportation accountability board is to implement the recommendations of the
Blue Ribbon Commission on Transportation regarding the adoption of
transportation benchmarks as a cornerstone of government accountability at the
state, city, county, and transit district levels. The legislature embraces
that recommendation. Monitoring performance of the system and measuring
results will be the basis for all transportation strategies.

The transportation
accountability board will develop a strategy and implement a plan for a
performance measurement system. The system must include data gathering,
analysis, development of recommendations, monitoring the implementation of
recommendations, and a process for reporting transportation system performance
to the governor's office, the legislature, and the public.

Sec. 2. RCW 47.01.021 and 1977
ex.s. c 151 s 2 are each amended to read as follows:

As used in this title
unless the context indicates otherwise:

(1)
"Department" means the department of transportation created in RCW
47.01.031;

(2)
"Commission" means the transportation ((commission)) accountability
board created in ((RCW 47.01.051)) section 3 of this act;

(3)
"Secretary" means the secretary of transportation as provided for in
RCW 47.01.041.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
3. A new section is added
to chapter 47.01 RCW to read as follows:

TRANSPORTATION
ACCOUNTABILITY BOARD. (1) The transportation accountability board is created.

(2) To ensure
continuity and an expert knowledge base, the governor may select from among the
members of the transportation commission when making initial board
appointments.

(3) The board is
composed of five members. The governor shall appoint the members of the board
with the advice and consent of the senate for terms of four years, except that
two members initially are appointed for terms of two years. Members should
have transportation experience in management, operations, planning, budgeting,
project management, or performance measurement.

(4) The governor may
not remove members from the board before the expiration of their terms unless
for cause based upon a determination of incapacity, incompetence, neglect of
duty, or malfeasance in office by the Thurston county superior court, upon
petition and show cause proceedings brought for that purpose in that court and
directed to the board member in question.

(5) No member may be
appointed for more than three consecutive terms.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
4. A new section is added
to chapter 47.01 RCW to read as follows:

MEETINGS AND
ORGANIZATION. (1) The board shall meet periodically upon the call of its
chair. It may adopt its own rules and may establish its own procedures. It
shall act collectively in harmony with recorded resolutions or motions adopted
by a majority vote of the members.

(2) The board shall
elect one of its members as the chair for a term of two years. The chair may
vote on all matters before the board.

(3) Each member of the
board will be compensated in accordance with RCW 43.03.250 and reimbursed for
actual necessary traveling and other expenses in going to, attending, and
returning from meetings of the board or that are incurred in the discharge of
duties requested by the chair. However, in no event may a board member be
compensated in any year for more than one hundred twenty days, except the chair
of the board may be compensated for not more than one hundred fifty days.
Service on the board does not qualify as a service credit for the purposes of a
public retirement system.

(4) The board shall keep
proper records and is subject to audit by the state auditor.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
5. A new section is added
to chapter 47.01 RCW to read as follows:

ADMINISTRATION AND
STAFF. (1) The board, at its option, may appoint a professional administrator
and staff, who shall serve at its pleasure and whose salary is set by the
board, or make provisions ensuring these responsibilities are carried out by
the legislative evaluation and accountability program. Staff support to the board
will be provided by the legislative evaluation and accountability program,
which shall provide professional support for the duties, functions,
responsibilities, and activities of the board, including but not limited to
information technology systems; data collection, processing, analysis, and
reporting; project management; and office space, equipment, and secretarial
support.

(2) The board may from
time to time retain planners, consultants, and other technical personnel to
advise it in the performance of its duties.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
6. A new section is added
to chapter 47.01 RCW to read as follows:

POWERS AND DUTIES. (1)
The transportation accountability board shall serve as a single, independent,
statewide point of accountability for reporting, analyzing, and monitoring the
performance of an integrated transportation system. The board has the
following responsibilities:

(a) Develop performance
measures for the transportation system for the purposes enumerated in section 1
of this act;

(b) Implement and
oversee the attainment of benchmarks and performance measures that have been
adopted by the board;

(c) Report biennially
to the governor and the legislature on progress toward achieving recommended
reforms and efficiencies, and make policy recommendations for furthering
progress toward achieving;

(d) Monitor and report
the efforts at the state, city, county, and transit district levels on adopting
leading-edge transportation strategies.

(2) The board must be
given timely access, upon written request of the administrator, to all machine
readable, printed, and other data of state agencies relative to transportation
expenditures, budgets, and related fiscal matters.

(3) In developing the
benchmarks and performance measures, the board shall solicit the input from
cities, counties, transits, state agencies, transportation stakeholders, and
the public. The board shall report back to the legislature on the adopted
benchmarks and performance measures by January 1, 2003.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
7. A new section is added
to chapter 47.01 RCW to read as follows:

To carry out section 5
of this act, the legislative evaluation and accountability program shall
provide for:

(1) Automated data
bases and application systems in support of board requirements to monitor,
evaluate, analyze, report, and review;

(2) Maintenance of
computer software, application programs, data bases, and related documentation;

(3) Education,
training, and programming services;

(4) Procedural
documentation support; and

(5) Consulting
assistance on special projects.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
8. A new section is added
to chapter 47.01 RCW to read as follows:

By December 15th of
each even‑numbered year, the transportation accountability board shall
prepare and submit to the house and senate standing committees on
transportation and the office of financial management, a comprehensive
statewide report on transportation systems at the state, county, city, and transit
levels, measuring each system's performance and progress in achieving the
benchmarks and performance measures adopted by the board under section 6 of
this act.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
9. A new section is added
to chapter 47.01 RCW to read as follows:

The board shall
cooperate, act, and function with Washington state legislative committees and
may cooperate with the councils or committees of other states similar to this
board and with other interstate research organizations.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
10. A new section is added
to chapter 43.105 RCW to read as follows:

The transportation
accountability board is expressly exempt from this chapter.

Sec. 11. RCW 43.17.020 and 1995 1st
sp.s. c 2 s 2 are each amended to read as follows:

There shall be a chief
executive officer of each department to be known as: (1) The secretary of
social and health services, (2) the director of ecology, (3) the director of
labor and industries, (4) the director of agriculture, (5) the director of fish
and wildlife, (6) the secretary of transportation, (7) the director of
licensing, (8) the director of general administration, (9) the director of
community, trade, and economic development, (10) the director of veterans
affairs, (11) the director of revenue, (12) the director of retirement systems,
(13) the secretary of corrections, ((and)) (14) the secretary of health,
and (15) the director of financial institutions.

Such officers, except
the ((secretary of transportation and the)) director of fish and
wildlife, shall be appointed by the governor, with the consent of the senate,
and hold office at the pleasure of the governor. ((The secretary of
transportation shall be appointed by the transportation commission as
prescribed by RCW 47.01.041.)) The director of fish and wildlife shall be
appointed by the fish and wildlife commission as prescribed by RCW 77.04.055.

Sec. 12. RCW 47.01.041 and 1983
1st ex.s. c 53 s 28 are each amended to read as follows:

The executive head of
the department of transportation shall be the secretary of transportation, who
shall be appointed by the ((transportation commission, and)) governor
with the consent of the senate. The secretary shall be paid a salary to be
fixed by the governor in accordance with the provisions of RCW 43.03.040. The
secretary ((shall be an ex officio member of the commission without a vote.
The secretary shall be the chief executive officer of the commission and be responsible
to it, and shall be guided by policies established by it. The secretary shall
serve until removed by the commission, but only for incapacity, incompetence,
neglect of duty, malfeasance in office, or failure to carry out the
commission's policies. Before a motion for dismissal shall be acted on by the
commission, the secretary shall be granted a hearing on formal written charges
before the full commission. An action by the commission to remove the
secretary shall be final)) serves at the pleasure of the governor.

Sec. 13. RCW 47.01.101 and 1987 c
505 s 48 and 1987 c 179 s 1 are each reenacted and amended to read as follows:

The secretary shall
have the authority and it shall be his or her duty, subject to policy guidance
from the ((commission)) governor:

(1) To serve as chief
executive officer of the department with full administrative authority to
direct all its activities;

(2) To organize the
department as he or she may deem necessary to carry out the work and
responsibilities of the department effectively;

(3) To designate and
establish such transportation district or branch offices as may be necessary or
convenient, and to appoint assistants and delegate any powers, duties, and
functions to them or any officer or employee of the department as deemed
necessary to administer the department efficiently;

(4) To direct and
coordinate the programs of the various divisions of the department to assure
that they achieve the greatest possible mutual benefit, produce a balanced
overall effort, and eliminate unnecessary duplication of activity;

(5) To adopt all
department rules that are subject to the adoption procedures contained in the
state Administrative Procedure Act((, except rules
subject to adoption by the commission pursuant to statute));

(6) To maintain and
safeguard the official records of the department((, including the
commission's recorded resolutions and orders));

(7) ((To provide
full staff support to the commission to assist it in carrying out its
functions, powers, and duties and to execute the policy established by the
commission pursuant to its legislative authority;

(8))) To execute and implement the biennial operating
budget for the operation of the department in accordance with chapter 43.88 RCW
and with legislative appropriation and, in such manner as prescribed therein,
to make and report to the ((commission)) governor and the chairs
of the transportation committees of the senate and house of representatives,
including one copy to the staff of each of the committees, deviations from the
planned biennial category A and H highway construction programs necessary to
adjust to unexpected delays or other unanticipated circumstances((.));

(((9))) (8)
To exercise all other powers and perform all other duties as are now or
hereafter provided by law.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
14. A new section is added
to chapter 47.01 RCW to read as follows:

All references in the
Revised Code of Washington to the transportation commission that assign
committee membership, or administrative or policy-making authority, are
transferred to the secretary of transportation.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
15. The following acts or
parts of acts are each repealed:

(1) RCW 47.01.051 (Commission created‑-Appointment
of members‑-Terms‑-Qualifications‑-Removal) and 1977 ex.s. c
151 s 5;

(2) RCW 47.01.061 (Commission‑-Procedures
and internal operations) and 1987 c 364 s 2, 1984 c 287 s 94, 1983 1st ex.s. c
53 s 29, 1981 c 59 s 1, & 1977 ex.s. c 151 s 6; and

(3) RCW 47.01.070 (Director's and
commissioner's prior assignments may be delegated) and 1977 ex.s. c 151 s 27
& 1961 c 13 s 47.01.070.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
16. Sections 1 through 15 of
this act take effect July 1, 2002.

PART
II

ALTERNATIVE DELIVERY PROCEDURES FOR
CONSTRUCTION SERVICES

NEW SECTION. Sec.
17. The legislature finds
that there is a pressing need for additional transportation projects to meet
the mobility needs of Washington citizens. With major new investments approved
to meet these pressing needs, additional work force assistance is necessary to
ensure and enhance project delivery timelines. Recruiting and retaining a high
quality work force, and implementing new and innovative procedures for
delivering these transportation projects is required to accomplish them on a
timely basis that best serves the public. It is the intent of sections 18 and
19 of this act that no state employees will lose their employment as a result
of implementing new and innovative project delivery procedures.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
18. A new section is added
to chapter 47.28 RCW to read as follows:

(1) The department of
transportation shall work with representatives of transportation labor groups
to develop and implement a financial incentive program to aid in retention and
recruitment of employee classifications where problems exist and program
delivery is negatively affected. The department shall accommodate the impacts
of the financial incentive program within its newly enacted capital construction
budgets. The department of personnel shall implement, as required, specific
aspects of the financial incentive package, as developed by the department of
transportation.

(2) Notwithstanding
chapter 41.06 RCW, the department of transportation may acquire consultant
services from qualified private firms in order to deliver the transportation
construction program to the public. Consultant services may be acquired solely
for augmenting the department's work force capacity and only when the
department's transportation construction program cannot be delivered through
its existing or readily available work force. The department of transportation
shall work with representatives of transportation labor groups to develop and
implement a program identifying those projects requiring contract services
while establishing a program as defined in subsection (1) of this section to
provide the classified personnel necessary to deliver future construction
programs. The procedures for acquiring construction engineering services from
private firms may not be used to displace existing state employees nor diminish
the number of existing classified positions in the present construction
program. The acquisition procedures must be in accordance with chapter 39.80
RCW.

(3) Starting in
December 2003, and biennially thereafter, the secretary shall report to the
transportation committees of the legislature on the use of construction
engineering services from private firms authorized under this section. The
information provided to the committees must include an assessment of the
benefits and costs associated with using engineering services, or other
services, from private firms, and a comparison of public versus private sector
costs. The secretary is authorized to act on these findings to ensure the most
cost-effective means of service delivery.

Sec. 19. RCW 41.06.380 and 1979
ex.s. c 46 s 2 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) Nothing
contained in this chapter shall prohibit any department, as defined in RCW
41.06.020, from purchasing services by contract with individuals or business
entities if such services were regularly purchased by valid contract by such
department prior to April 23, 1979: PROVIDED, That no such contract may be
executed or renewed if it would have the effect of terminating classified
employees or classified employee positions existing at the time of the
execution or renewal of the contract.

(2) Nothing
contained in this chapter prohibits the department of transportation from
purchasing construction engineering services by contract from qualified private
businesses as specified in section 18(2) of this act.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
20. Sections 17 through 19 of
this act and RCW 41.06.380(2) are null and void if new transportation revenues
do not become law by January 1, 2002. Sections 17 through 19 of this act and
RCW 41.06.380(2) are effective only for the period consistent with the new
transportation revenues, after which time these provisions will expire.

PART
III

APPRENTICESHIP AND ADJUSTMENTS TO PREVAILING
WAGE PROVISIONS

NEW SECTION. Sec.
21. (1) The legislature finds
that a skilled technical work force is necessary for maintaining, preserving,
and improving Washington's transportation system. The Blue Ribbon Commission
on Transportation found that state and local transportation agencies are
showing signs of a work force that is insufficiently skilled to operate the
transportation system at its highest level. Sections 21 through 29 of this act
are intended to explore methods for fostering a stronger industry in
transportation planning and engineering.

(2) It is the intent of
the legislature that the state prevailing wage process operate efficiently,
that the process allow contractors and workers to be paid promptly, and that
new technologies and innovative outreach methods be used to enhance wage
surveys in order to better reflect current wages in counties across the state.

(3) The legislature
finds that in order to enhance the prevailing wage process it is appropriate
for all intent and affidavit fees paid by contractors be dedicated to the sole
purpose of administering the state prevailing wage program.

(4) To accomplish the
intent of this section and in order to enhance the response of businesses and
labor representatives to the prevailing wage survey process, the department
shall undertake the following activities:

(a) Establish a goal of
conducting surveys for each trade every three years;

(b) Actively promote
increased response rates from all survey recipients in every county both urban
and rural. The department shall provide public education and technical
assistance to businesses, labor representatives, and public agencies in order
to promote a better understanding of prevailing wage laws and increased
participation in the prevailing wage survey process;

(c) Actively work with
businesses, labor representatives, public agencies, and others to ensure the
integrity of information used in the development of prevailing wage rates, and
ensure uniform compliance with requirements of sections 21 through 29 of this
act;

(d) Maintain a timely
processing of intents and affidavits, with a target processing time no greater
than seven working days from receipt of completed forms;

(e) Develop and
implement electronic processing of intents and affidavits and promote the
efficient and effective use of technology to improve the services provided by
the prevailing wage program.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
22. A new section is added
to chapter 49.04 RCW to read as follows:

The apprenticeship
council shall work with the department of transportation, local transportation
jurisdictions, local and state joint apprenticeships, representatives of
transportation labor groups, and representatives of the state's universities
and community and vocational colleges to establish technical apprenticeship
opportunities specific to the needs of transportation. The council shall issue
a report of findings and recommendations to the transportation committees of
the legislature by December 1, 2001. The report must include, but not be
limited to, findings and recommendations regarding the establishment of
transportation technical training programs within the community and vocational
college system and in the state universities.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
23. A new section is added
to chapter 47.01 RCW to read as follows:

The department of
transportation shall work with local transportation jurisdictions and
representatives of transportation labor groups to establish a human resources
skills bank of transportation professionals. The skills bank must be designed
to allow all transportation authorities to draw from it when needed. The
department shall issue a report of findings and recommendations to the
transportation committees of the legislature by December 1, 2001. The report
must include, but not be limited to, identification of any statutory or
administrative rule changes necessary to create the skills bank and allow it to
function in the manner described.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
24. A new section is added
to chapter 47.06 RCW to read as follows:

The state-interest
component of the statewide multimodal transportation plan must include a plan
for enhancing the skills of the existing technical transportation work force.

Sec. 25. RCW 47.80.030 and 1998 c
171 s 9 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) Each regional
transportation planning organization shall develop in cooperation with the
department of transportation, providers of public transportation and high
capacity transportation, ports, and local governments within the region, adopt,
and periodically update a regional transportation plan that:

(a) Is based on a least
cost planning methodology that identifies the most cost-effective facilities,
services, and programs;

(b) Identifies existing
or planned transportation facilities, services, and programs, including but not
limited to major roadways including state highways and regional arterials,
transit and nonmotorized services and facilities, multimodal and intermodal
facilities, marine ports and airports, railroads, and noncapital programs
including transportation demand management that should function as an
integrated regional transportation system, giving emphasis to those facilities,
services, and programs that exhibit one or more of the following
characteristics:

(i) Crosses member
county lines;

(ii) Is or will be used
by a significant number of people who live or work outside the county in which
the facility, service, or project is located;

(iii) Significant
impacts are expected to be felt in more than one county;

(iv) Potentially
adverse impacts of the facility, service, program, or project can be better
avoided or mitigated through adherence to regional policies;

(v) Transportation
needs addressed by a project have been identified by the regional
transportation planning process and the remedy is deemed to have regional
significance; and

(vi) Provides for
system continuity;

(c) Establishes level
of service standards for state highways and state ferry routes, with the
exception of transportation facilities of statewide significance as defined in
RCW 47.06.140. These regionally established level of service standards for
state highways and state ferries shall be developed jointly with the department
of transportation, to encourage consistency across jurisdictions. In
establishing level of service standards for state highways and state ferries,
consideration shall be given for the necessary balance between providing for
the free interjurisdictional movement of people and goods and the needs of
local commuters using state facilities;

(d) Includes a
financial plan demonstrating how the regional transportation plan can be
implemented, indicating resources from public and private sources that are
reasonably expected to be made available to carry out the plan, and
recommending any innovative financing techniques to finance needed facilities,
services, and programs;

(e) Assesses regional
development patterns, capital investment and other measures necessary to:

(i) Ensure the
preservation of the existing regional transportation system, including
requirements for operational improvements, resurfacing, restoration, and
rehabilitation of existing and future major roadways, as well as operations,
maintenance, modernization, and rehabilitation of existing and future transit,
railroad systems and corridors, and nonmotorized facilities; and

(ii) Make the most
efficient use of existing transportation facilities to relieve vehicular
congestion and maximize the mobility of people and goods;

(f) Sets forth a
proposed regional transportation approach, including capital investments,
service improvements, programs, and transportation demand management measures
to guide the development of the integrated, multimodal regional transportation
system; ((and))

(g) Where appropriate,
sets forth the relationship of high capacity transportation providers and other
public transit providers with regard to responsibility for, and the coordination
between, services and facilities; and

(h) Provides for
training that enhances the skills of the existing technical transportation work
force.

(2) The organization
shall review the regional transportation plan biennially for currency and
forward the adopted plan along with documentation of the biennial review to the
state department of transportation.

(3) All transportation
projects, programs, and transportation demand management measures within the
region that have an impact upon regional facilities or services must be
consistent with the plan and with the adopted regional growth and
transportation strategies.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
26. The department of labor
and industries, in cooperation with the department of transportation, shall
conduct an assessment of the current practices, including survey techniques,
used in setting prevailing wages for those trades related to transportation
facilities and transportation project delivery. The assessment must include an
analysis of regional variations. A final report must be submitted to the
governor and the transportation committees of the senate and house of
representatives by December 1, 2001.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
27. A new section is added
to chapter 39.12 RCW to read as follows:

(1) In establishing the
prevailing rate of wage under RCW 39.12.010, 39.12.015, and 39.12.020, all data
collected by the department may be used only in the county for which the work
was performed.

(2) This section only
applies to prevailing wage surveys initiated on or after August 1, 2001.

Sec. 28. RCW 39.12.070 and 1993 c
404 s 1 are each amended to read as follows:

The department of labor
and industries may charge fees to awarding agencies on public works for the
approval of statements of intent to pay prevailing wages and the certification
of affidavits of wages paid. The department may also charge fees to persons or
organizations requesting the arbitration of disputes under RCW 39.12.060. The
amount of the fees shall be established by rules adopted by the department
under the procedures in the administrative procedure act, chapter 34.05 RCW.
The fees shall apply to all approvals, certifications, and arbitration requests
made after the effective date of the rules. All fees shall be deposited in the
public works administration account. ((On the fifteenth day of the first
month of each quarterly period, an amount equalling thirty percent of the
revenues received into the public works administration account shall be transferred
into the general fund.)) The department may refuse to arbitrate for
contractors, subcontractors, persons, or organizations which have not paid the
proper fees. The department may, if necessary, request the attorney general to
take legal action to collect delinquent fees.

The department shall
set the fees permitted by this section at a level that generates revenue that
is as near as practicable to the amount of the appropriation to administer this
chapter, including, but not limited to, the performance of adequate wage
surveys, and to investigate and enforce all alleged violations of this chapter,
including, but not limited to, incorrect statements of intent to pay prevailing
wage, incorrect certificates of affidavits of wages paid, and wage claims, as
provided for in this chapter and chapters 49.48 and 49.52 RCW. However, the
fees charged for the approval of statements of intent to pay prevailing wages
and the certification of affidavits of wages paid shall be no greater than
twenty-five dollars.

Sec. 29. RCW 39.12.080 and 2001 c
219 s 3 are each amended to read as follows:

The public works
administration account is created in the state treasury. The department of
labor and industries shall deposit in the account all moneys received from fees
or civil penalties collected under RCW 39.12.050, 39.12.065, and 39.12.070.
Appropriations from the account((, not including moneys transferred to the
general fund pursuant to RCW 39.12.070,)) may be made only for the purposes
of administration of this chapter, including, but not limited to, the
performance of adequate wage surveys, and for the investigation and enforcement
of all alleged violations of this chapter as provided for in this chapter and
chapters 49.48 and 49.52 RCW.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
30. Sections 21 through 29 of
this act are null and void if new transportation revenues do not become law by
January 1, 2002.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
31. The sum of nine hundred
fifty thousand dollars, or as much thereof as may be necessary, is appropriated
from the public works administration account to the department of labor and
industries for the biennium ending June 30, 2003, to carry out the purposes of
sections 26 through 29 of this act.

PART
IV

TRANSPORTATION PLANNING AND
EFFICIENCY

Sec. 32. RCW 47.05.010 and 1993 c
490 s 1 are each amended to read as follows:

The legislature finds
that solutions to state highway deficiencies have become increasingly complex
and diverse and that anticipated transportation revenues will fall
substantially short of the amount required to satisfy all transportation
needs. Difficult investment trade-offs will be required.

It is the intent of the
legislature that investment of state transportation funds to address
deficiencies on the state highway system be based on a policy of priority
programming having as its basis the rational selection of projects and services
according to factual need and an evaluation of life cycle costs and benefits ((and
which)) that are systematically scheduled to carry out defined
objectives within available revenue. The state must develop analytic tools to
use a common methodology to measure benefits and costs for all modes.

The priority
programming system ((shall)) must ensure preservation of the
existing state highway system, relieve congestion, provide mobility for
people and goods, support the state's economy, and promote environmental
protection and energy conservation.

The priority
programming system ((shall)) must implement the state-owned
highway component of the statewide ((multimodal)) transportation plan,
consistent with local and regional transportation plans, by targeting state
transportation investment to appropriate multimodal solutions ((which)) that
address identified state highway system deficiencies.

The priority
programming system for improvements ((shall)) must incorporate a
broad range of solutions that are identified in the statewide ((multimodal))
transportation plan as appropriate to address state highway system deficiencies,
including but not limited to highway expansion, efficiency improvements,
nonmotorized transportation facilities, high occupancy vehicle facilities,
transit facilities and services, rail facilities and services, and
transportation demand management programs.

Sec. 33. RCW 47.05.030 and 1998 c
171 s 6 are each amended to read as follows:

The transportation
commission shall adopt a comprehensive six-year investment program specifying
program objectives and performance measures for the preservation and
improvement programs defined in this section. In the specification of
investment program objectives and performance measures, the transportation
commission, in consultation with the Washington state department of
transportation, shall define and adopt standards for effective programming and
prioritization practices including a needs analysis process. The ((needs))
analysis process ((shall)) must ensure the identification of
problems and deficiencies, the evaluation of alternative solutions and
trade-offs, and estimations of the costs and benefits of prospective projects.
The investment program ((shall)) must be revised biennially,
effective on July 1st of odd-numbered years. The investment program ((shall))
must be based upon the needs identified in the state-owned highway
component of the statewide ((multimodal)) transportation plan as defined
in RCW 47.01.071(3).

(1) The preservation
program ((shall)) consists of those investments necessary to
preserve the existing state highway system and to restore existing safety
features, giving consideration to lowest life cycle costing. The
preservation program must require use of the most cost-effective pavement
surfaces, considering:

(a) Life-cycle cost
analysis;

(b) Traffic volume;

(c) Subgrade soil
conditions;

(d) Environmental
and weather conditions;

(e) Materials
available; and

(f) Construction
factors.

The comprehensive
six-year investment program for preservation ((shall)) must
identify projects for two years and an investment plan for the remaining four
years.

(2) The improvement
program ((shall)) consists of investments needed to address
identified deficiencies on the state highway system to increase mobility,
address congestion, and improve ((mobility,)) safety, support for
the economy, and protection of the environment. The six-year investment
program for improvements ((shall)) must identify projects for two
years and major deficiencies proposed to be addressed in the six-year period
giving consideration to relative benefits and life cycle costing. The
transportation commission shall give higher priority for correcting identified
deficiencies on those facilities classified as facilities of statewide
significance as defined in RCW 47.06.140. Project prioritization must be
based primarily upon cost-benefit analysis, where appropriate.

The
transportation commission shall approve and present the comprehensive six-year
investment program to the legislature in support of the biennial budget request
under RCW 44.40.070 and 44.40.080.

Sec. 34. RCW 47.05.035 and 1993 c
490 s 4 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) The department
and the commission shall use the transportation demand modeling tools developed
under subsection (2) of this section to evaluate investments based on the best
mode or improvement, or mix of modes and improvements, to meet current and
future long-term demand within a corridor or system for the lowest cost. The
end result of these demand modeling tools is to provide a cost-benefit analysis
by which the department and the commission can determine the relative mobility
improvement and congestion relief each mode or improvement under consideration
will provide and the relative investment each mode or improvement under
consideration will need to achieve that relief.

(2) The department
will participate in the refinement, enhancement, and application of existing
transportation demand modeling tools to be used to evaluate investments. This
participation and use of transportation demand modeling tools will be phased
in. The first phase will build upon the modeling work initiated by the
four-county Puget Sound regional council.

(3) In
developing program objectives and performance measures, the transportation
commission shall evaluate investment trade-offs between the preservation and
improvement programs. In making these investment trade-offs, the commission
shall evaluate, using cost-benefit techniques, roadway and bridge maintenance
activities as compared to roadway and bridge preservation program activities
and adjust those programs accordingly.

(4) The
commission shall allocate the estimated revenue between preservation and
improvement programs giving primary consideration to the following factors:

(((1))) (a)
The relative needs in each of the programs and the system performance levels
that can be achieved by meeting these needs;

(((2))) (b)
The need to provide adequate funding for preservation to protect the state's
investment in its existing highway system;

(((3))) (c)
The continuity of future transportation development with those improvements previously
programmed; and

(((4)))
(d) The availability of dedicated funds for a specific type of work.

Sec. 35. RCW 47.06.130 and 1993 c
446 s 13 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) The
department may carry out special transportation planning studies to resolve
specific issues with the development of the state transportation system or
other statewide transportation issues.

(2) The department
shall conduct multimodal corridor analyses on major congested corridors where
needed improvements are likely to cost in excess of one hundred million
dollars. Analysis will include the cost-effectiveness of all feasible
strategies in addressing congestion or improving mobility within the corridor,
and must recommend the most effective strategy or mix of strategies to address
identified deficiencies. A long-term view of corridors must be employed to
determine whether an existing corridor should be expanded, a city or county
road should become a state route, and whether a new corridor is needed to
alleviate congestion and enhance mobility based on travel demand. To the
extent practicable, full costs of all strategies must be reflected in the
analysis. At a minimum, this analysis must include:

(a) The current and
projected future demand for total person trips on that corridor;

(b) The impact of
making no improvements to that corridor;

(c) The daily cost
per added person served for each mode or improvement proposed to meet demand;

(d) The cost per
hour of travel time saved per day for each mode or improvement proposed to meet
demand; and

(e) How much of the
current and anticipated future demand will be met and left unmet for each mode
or improvement proposed to meet demand.

The end result of this
analysis will be to provide a cost-benefit analysis by which policymakers can
determine the most cost-effective improvement or mode, or mix of improvements
and modes, for increasing mobility and reducing congestion.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
36. The legislature intends
that funding for transportation improvements be allocated to the worst traffic
chokepoints in the state. Furthermore, the legislature intends to fund
projects that provide systemic relief throughout a transportation corridor,
rather than spot improvements that fail to improve overall mobility within a
corridor.

Sec. 37. RCW 47.05.051 and 1998 c
175 s 12 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) The
comprehensive six-year investment program shall be based upon the needs
identified in the state-owned highway component of the statewide multimodal
transportation plan as defined in RCW 47.01.071(3) and priority selection
systems that incorporate the following criteria:

(((1))) (a)
Priority programming for the preservation program shall take into account the
following, not necessarily in order of importance:

(((a))) (i)
Extending the service life of the existing highway system, including using
the most cost-effective pavement surfaces, considering:

(A) Life-cycle cost
analysis;

(B) Traffic volume;

(C) Subgrade soil
conditions;

(D) Environmental
and weather conditions;

(E) Materials
available; and

(F) Construction
factors;

(((b))) (ii)
Ensuring the structural ability to carry loads imposed upon highways and
bridges; and

(((c))) (iii)
Minimizing life cycle costs. The transportation commission in carrying out the
provisions of this section may delegate to the department of transportation the
authority to select preservation projects to be included in the six-year
program.

(((2))) (b)
Priority programming for the improvement program ((shall take into account))
must be based primarily upon the following:

(((a))) (i)
Traffic congestion, delay, and accidents;

(ii) Location within
a heavily traveled transportation corridor;

(iii)
Synchronization with other potential transportation projects, including transit
and multimodal projects, within the heavily traveled corridor; and

(iv) Use of benefit/cost
analysis wherever feasible to determine the value of the proposed project.

(c) Priority
programming for the improvement program may also take into account:

(i) Support for
the state's economy, including job creation and job preservation;

(((b))) (ii)
The cost-effective movement of people and goods;

(((c))) (iii)
Accident and accident risk reduction;

(((d))) (iv)
Protection of the state's natural environment;

(((e))) (v)
Continuity and systematic development of the highway transportation network;

(((f))) (vi)
Consistency with local comprehensive plans developed under chapter 36.70A RCW;

(((g))) (vii)
Consistency with regional transportation plans developed under chapter 47.80
RCW;

(((h))) (viii)
Public views concerning proposed improvements;

(((i))) (ix)
The conservation of energy resources;

(((j))) (x)
Feasibility of financing the full proposed improvement;

(((k))) (xi)
Commitments established in previous legislative sessions;

(((l))) (xii)
Relative costs and benefits of candidate programs((;)).

(((m))) (d)
Major projects addressing capacity deficiencies which prioritize allowing for
preliminary engineering shall be reprioritized during the succeeding biennium,
based upon updated project data. Reprioritized projects may be delayed or
canceled by the transportation commission if higher priority projects are
awaiting funding((; and)).

(((n))) (e)
Major project approvals which significantly increase a project's scope or cost
from original prioritization estimates shall include a review of the project's
estimated revised priority rank and the level of funding provided. Projects
may be delayed or canceled by the transportation commission if higher priority
projects are awaiting funding.

(((3))) (2)
The commission may depart from the priority programming established under
subsection((s)) (1) ((and (2))) of this section: (a) To the
extent that otherwise funds cannot be utilized feasibly within the program; (b)
as may be required by a court judgment, legally binding agreement, or state and
federal laws and regulations; (c) as may be required to coordinate with
federal, local, or other state agency construction projects; (d) to take
advantage of some substantial financial benefit that may be available; (e) for
continuity of route development; or (f) because of changed financial or
physical conditions of an unforeseen or emergent nature. The commission or
secretary of transportation shall maintain in its files information sufficient
to show the extent to which the commission has departed from the established
priority.

(((4))) (3)
The commission shall identify those projects that yield freight mobility
benefits or that alleviate the impacts of freight mobility upon affected
communities.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
38. The department of
transportation shall report the results of its priority programming under RCW
47.05.051 to the transportation committees of the senate and house of
representatives by December 1, 2002, and December 1, 2004.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
39. The legislature finds
that roads, streets, bridges, and highways in the state represent public assets
worth over one hundred billion dollars. These investments require regular
maintenance and preservation, or rehabilitation, to provide cost-effective
transportation services. Many of these facilities are in poor condition.
Given the magnitude of public investment and the importance of safe, reliable
roadways to the motoring public, the legislature intends to create stronger
accountability to ensure that cost-effective maintenance and preservation is
provided for these transportation facilities.

Sec. 40. RCW 35.84.060 and 1969
ex.s. c 281 s 26 are each amended to read as follows:

Every municipal corporation
which owns or operates an urban public transportation system as defined in RCW
47.04.082 within its corporate limits, may acquire, construct, extend, own,
or operate such urban public transportation system to any point or points not
to exceed fifteen miles outside of its corporate limits: PROVIDED, That no
municipal corporation shall extend its urban public transportation system
beyond its corporate limits to operate in any territory already served by a
privately operated auto transportation company holding a certificate of public
convenience and necessity from the utilities and transportation commission.

As a condition of
receiving state funding, the municipal corporation shall submit a maintenance
management plan for certification by the transportation commission or its
successor entity. The plan must inventory all transportation system assets
within the direction and control of the municipality, and provide a
preservation plan based on lowest life cycle cost methodologies.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
41. A new section is added
to chapter 36.56 RCW to read as follows:

As a condition of
receiving state funding, a county that has assumed the transportation functions
of a metropolitan municipal corporation shall submit a maintenance and
preservation management plan for certification by the transportation commission
or its successor entity. The plan must inventory all transportation system
assets within the direction and control of the county, and provide a
preservation plan based on lowest life cycle cost methodologies.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
42. A new section is added
to chapter 36.57A RCW to read as follows:

As a condition of
receiving state funding, a public transportation benefit area authority shall submit
a maintenance and preservation management plan for certification by the
transportation commission or its successor entity. The plan must inventory all
transportation system assets within the direction and control of the authority,
and provide a preservation plan based on lowest life cycle cost methodologies.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
43. A new section is added
to chapter 46.68 RCW to read as follows:

During the 2001-2003
biennium, cities and towns shall provide to the transportation commission, or
its successor entity, preservation rating information on at least seventy
percent of the total city and town arterial network. Thereafter, the
preservation rating information requirement shall increase in five percent
increments in subsequent biennia. The rating system used by cities and towns
must be based upon the Washington state pavement rating method or an equivalent
standard approved by the transportation commission or its successor entity.

Sec. 44. RCW 47.06.050 and 1993 c
446 s 5 are each amended to read as follows:

The state-owned
facilities component of the statewide transportation plan shall consist of:

(1) The state highway
system plan, which identifies program and financing needs and recommends
specific and financially realistic improvements to preserve the structural
integrity of the state highway system, ensure acceptable operating conditions,
and provide for enhanced access to scenic, recreational, and cultural
resources. The state highway system plan shall contain the following elements:

(a) A system
preservation element, which shall establish structural preservation objectives
for the state highway system including bridges, identify current and future
structural deficiencies based upon analysis of current conditions and projected
future deterioration, and recommend program funding levels and specific actions
necessary to preserve the structural integrity of the state highway system
consistent with adopted objectives. Lowest life cycle cost methodologies
must be used in developing a pavement management system. This element
shall serve as the basis for the preservation component of the six-year highway
program and the two-year biennial budget request to the legislature;

(b) A highway
maintenance element, establishing service levels for highway maintenance on
state-owned highways that meet benchmarks established by the transportation
commission. The highway maintenance element must include an estimate of costs
for achieving those service levels over twenty years. This element will serve
as the basis for the maintenance component of the six-year highway program and
the two-year biennial budget request to the legislature;

(c) A capacity
and operational improvement element, which shall establish operational
objectives, including safety considerations, for moving people and goods on the
state highway system, identify current and future capacity, operational, and
safety deficiencies, and recommend program funding levels and specific
improvements and strategies necessary to achieve the operational objectives.
In developing capacity and operational improvement plans the department shall
first assess strategies to enhance the operational efficiency of the existing
system before recommending system expansion. Strategies to enhance the
operational efficiencies include but are not limited to access management,
transportation system management, demand management, and high-occupancy vehicle
facilities. The capacity and operational improvement element must conform to
the state implementation plan for air quality and be consistent with regional
transportation plans adopted under chapter 47.80 RCW, and shall serve as the
basis for the capacity and operational improvement portions of the six-year
highway program and the two-year biennial budget request to the legislature;

(((c))) (d)
A scenic and recreational highways element, which shall identify and recommend
designation of scenic and recreational highways, provide for enhanced access to
scenic, recreational, and cultural resources associated with designated routes,
and recommend a variety of management strategies to protect, preserve, and
enhance these resources. The department, affected counties, cities, and towns,
regional transportation planning organizations, and other state or federal
agencies shall jointly develop this element;

(((d))) (e)
A paths and trails element, which shall identify the needs of nonmotorized
transportation modes on the state transportation systems and provide the basis
for the investment of state transportation funds in paths and trails, including
funding provided under chapter 47.30 RCW.

(2) The state ferry
system plan, which shall guide capital and operating investments in the state
ferry system. The plan shall establish service objectives for state ferry
routes, forecast travel demand for the various markets served in the system, ((and))
develop strategies for ferry system investment that consider regional and
statewide vehicle and passenger needs, support local land use plans, and assure
that ferry services are fully integrated with other transportation services. The
plan must provide for maintenance of capital assets. The plan must also
provide for preservation of capital assets based on lowest life cycle cost
methodologies. The plan shall assess the role of private ferries operating
under the authority of the utilities and transportation commission and shall
coordinate ferry system capital and operational plans with these private
operations. The ferry system plan must be consistent with the regional
transportation plans for areas served by the state ferry system, and shall be
developed in conjunction with the ferry advisory committees.

Sec. 45. RCW 47.06.090 and 1993 c
446 s 9 are each amended to read as follows:

The state-interest
component of the statewide multimodal transportation plan shall include an
intercity passenger rail plan, which shall analyze existing intercity passenger
rail service and recommend improvements to that service under the state
passenger rail service program including depot improvements, potential service
extensions, and ways to achieve higher train speeds.

For purposes of
maintaining and preserving any state-owned component of the state's passenger
rail program, the statewide multimodal transportation plan must identify all
such assets and provide a preservation plan based on lowest life cycle cost
methodologies.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
46. A new section is added
to chapter 81.112 RCW to read as follows:

As a condition of
receiving state funding, a regional transit authority shall submit a
maintenance and preservation management plan for certification by the
transportation commission or its successor entity. The plan must inventory all
transportation system assets within the direction and control of the transit
authority, and provide a plan for preservation of assets based on lowest life
cycle cost methodologies.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
47. A new section is added
to chapter 36.78 RCW to read as follows:

The board shall
establish a standard of good practice for maintenance of transportation system
assets. This standard must be implemented by all counties no later than
December 31, 2006. The board shall develop a model maintenance management
system for use by counties. The board shall develop rules to assist the
counties in the implementation of this system. Counties shall annually submit
their maintenance plans to the board. The board shall compile the county data
regarding maintenance management and annually submit it to the transportation
commission or its successor entity.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
48. Captions and part headings
used in this act are not part of the law.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
49. Sections 32 through 35 of
this act are necessary for the immediate preservation of the public peace,
health, or safety, or support of the state government and its existing public
institutions, and take effect July 1, 2001.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 50. If any provision of this
act or its application to any person or circumstance is held invalid, the
remainder of the act or the application of the provision to other persons or
circumstances is not affected.

---
END ---