BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF
WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1. RCW 90.46.010 and 2001 c
69 s 2 are each amended to read as follows:

The definitions in this
section apply throughout this chapter unless the context clearly requires
otherwise.

(1)
"Greywater" means wastewater having the consistency and strength of
residential domestic type wastewater. Greywater includes wastewater from
sinks, showers, and laundry fixtures, but does not include toilet or urinal
waters.

(2) "Land
application" means application of treated effluent for purposes of
irrigation or landscape enhancement for residential, business, and governmental
purposes.

(3) "Person"
means any state, individual, public or private corporation, political
subdivision, governmental subdivision, governmental agency, municipality,
copartnership, association, firm, trust estate, or any other legal entity
whatever.

(4) "Reclaimed
water" means effluent derived in any part from sewage from a wastewater
treatment system that has been adequately and reliably treated, so that as a
result of that treatment, it is suitable for a beneficial use or a controlled
use that would not otherwise occur and is no longer considered wastewater.

(5) "Sewage"
means water-carried human wastes from residences, buildings, industrial and
commercial establishments, or other places, together with such ground water
infiltration, surface waters, or industrial wastewater as may be present.

(6) "User"
means any person who uses reclaimed water.

(7)
"Wastewater" means water and wastes discharged from homes,
businesses, and industry to the sewer system.

(8) "Beneficial
use" means the use of reclaimed water, that has been transported from the
point of production to the point of use without an intervening discharge to the
waters of the state, for a beneficial purpose.

(9) "Direct
recharge" means the controlled subsurface addition of water directly to
the ground water basin that results in the replenishment of ground water.

(10) "Ground water
recharge criteria" means the contaminant criteria found in the drinking
water quality standards adopted by the state board of health pursuant to
chapter 43.20 RCW and the department of health pursuant to chapter 70.119A RCW.

(11) "Planned
ground water recharge project" means any reclaimed water project designed
for the purpose of recharging ground water, via direct recharge or surface
percolation.

(12) "Reclamation
criteria" means the criteria set forth in the water reclamation and reuse
interim standards and subsequent revisions adopted by the department of ecology
and the department of health.

(13) "Streamflow
augmentation" means the discharge of reclaimed water to rivers and streams
of the state or other surface water bodies, but not wetlands.

(14) "Surface
percolation" means the controlled application of water to the ground
surface for the purpose of replenishing ground water.

(15) "Wetland or
wetlands" means areas that are inundated or saturated by surface water or
ground water at a frequency and duration sufficient to support, and that under
normal circumstances do support, a prevalence of vegetation typically adapted
to life in saturated soil conditions. Wetlands generally include swamps,
marshes, bogs, and similar areas. Wetlands regulated under this chapter shall
be delineated in accordance with the manual adopted by the department of
ecology pursuant to RCW 90.58.380.

(16) "Constructed
beneficial use wetlands" means those wetlands intentionally constructed on
nonwetland sites to produce or replace natural wetland functions and values.
Constructed beneficial use wetlands are considered "waters of the
state."

(17) "Constructed
treatment wetlands" means those wetlands intentionally constructed on
nonwetland sites and managed for the primary purpose of wastewater or storm
water treatment. Constructed treatment wetlands are considered part of the
collection and treatment system and are not considered "waters of the state."

(18) "Agricultural
industrial process water" means water that has been used for the purpose
of ((agriculture [agricultural])) agricultural processing and has
been adequately and reliably treated, so that as a result of that treatment, it
is suitable for other agricultural water use.

(19) "Agricultural
processing" means the processing of crops or milk to produce a product
primarily for wholesale or retail sale for human or animal consumption,
including but not limited to potato, fruit, vegetable, and grain processing,
and brewing.

(20)
"Agricultural water use" means the use of water for irrigation and
other uses related to the production of agricultural products. These uses
include, but are not limited to, construction, operation, and maintenance of
agricultural facilities and livestock operations at farms, ranches, public
and private fish rearing facilities, dairies, and nurseries. Examples of
these uses include, but are not limited to, dust control, temperature control,
and fire control.

--- END ---