BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF
WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec.
1. The legislature finds
that greater flexibility to provide state financing for projects developed
under chapter 47.46 RCW will result in better use of public resources, lower
financing costs, and potential savings to taxpayers. The legislature intends
to: Clarify the ability of the department of transportation to use public and
private financing for projects selected and developed under chapter 47.46 RCW;
provide the department with specific means of state financing where that
financing is in the public's best interest; provide citizens living in the
impacted areas a statutory mechanism to review proposed toll rates and provide
input before adoption of toll schedules by the toll authority; and prevent
unreasonable delay of critical transportation projects that are essential for
public safety and welfare.

Sec. 2. RCW 47.46.030 and 1996 c
280 s 1 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) The secretary or a
designee shall solicit proposals from, and negotiate and enter into agreements
with, private entities to undertake as appropriate, together with the
department and other public entities, all or a portion of the study, planning,
design, construction, operation, and maintenance of transportation systems and
facilities, using in whole or in part public or private sources of
financing.

The public-private
initiatives program may develop up to six demonstration projects. Each
proposal shall be weighed on its own merits, and each of the six agreements
shall be negotiated individually, and as a stand-alone project.

(2) If project
proposals selected prior to September 1, 1994, are terminated by the public or
private sectors, the department shall not select any new projects, including
project proposals submitted to the department prior to September 1, 1994, and
designated by the transportation commission as placeholder projects, after June
16, 1995, until June 30, 1997.

The department, in
consultation with the legislative transportation committee, shall conduct a
program and fiscal audit of the public-private initiatives program for the
biennium ending June 30, 1997. The department shall submit a progress report
to the legislative transportation committee on the program and fiscal audit by
June 30, 1996, with preliminary and final audit reports due December 1, 1996,
and June 30, 1997, respectively.

The department shall
develop and submit a proposed public involvement plan to the 1997 legislature
to identify the process for selecting new potential projects and the associated
costs of implementing the plan. The legislature must adopt the public
involvement plan before the department may proceed with any activity related to
project identification and selection. Following legislative adoption of the
public involvement plan, the department is authorized to implement the plan and
to identify potential new projects.

The public involvement
plan for projects selected after June 30, 1997, shall, at a minimum, identify
projects that: (a) Have the potential of achieving overall public support
among users of the projects, residents of communities in the vicinity of the
projects, and residents of communities impacted by the projects; (b) meet a
state transportation need; (c) provide a significant state benefit; and (d)
provide competition among proposers and maximum cost benefits to users.
Prospective projects may include projects identified by the department or
submitted by the private sector.

Projects that meet the
minimum criteria established under this section and the requirements of the
public involvement plan developed by the department and approved by the
legislature shall be submitted to the Washington state transportation
commission for its review. The commission, in turn, shall submit a list of
eligible projects to the legislative transportation committee for its
consideration. Forty-five days after the submission to the legislative transportation
committee of the list of eligible projects, the secretary is authorized to
solicit proposals for the eligible project.

(3) Prior to entering
into agreements with private entities under the requirements of RCW 47.46.040
for any project proposal selected before September 1, 1994, or after June 30,
1997, except as provided for in subsections (((11) and)) (12) and
(13) of this section, the department shall require an advisory vote as
provided under subsections (5) through (10) of this section.

(4) The advisory vote
shall apply to project proposals selected prior to September 1, 1994, or after
June 30, 1997, that receive public opposition as demonstrated by the submission
to the department of original petitions bearing at least five thousand
signatures of individuals opposing the project collected and submitted in
accordance with the dates established in subsections (12) and (13) of this
section. The advisory vote shall be on the preferred alternative identified
under the requirements of chapter 43.21C RCW and, if applicable, the national
environmental policy act, 42 U.S.C. 4321 et seq. The execution by the
department of the advisory vote process established in this section is subject
to the prior appropriation of funds by the legislature for the purpose of
conducting environmental impact studies, a public involvement program, local
involvement committee activities, traffic and economic impact analyses,
engineering and technical studies, and the advisory vote.

(5) In preparing for
the advisory vote, the department shall conduct a comprehensive analysis of
traffic patterns and economic impact to define the geographical boundary of the
project area that is affected by the imposition of tolls or user fees
authorized under this chapter. The area so defined is referred to in this
section as the affected project area. In defining the affected project area,
the department shall, at a minimum, undertake: (a) A comparison of the
estimated percentage of residents of communities in the vicinity of the project
and in other communities impacted by the project who could be subject to tolls
or user fees and the estimated percentage of other users and transient traffic
that could be subject to tolls or user fees; (b) an analysis of the anticipated
traffic diversion patterns; (c) an analysis of the potential economic impact
resulting from proposed toll rates or user fee rates imposed on residents,
commercial traffic, and commercial entities in communities in the vicinity of
and impacted by the project; (d) an analysis of the economic impact of tolls or
user fees on the price of goods and services generally; and (e) an analysis of
the relationship of the project to state transportation needs and benefits.

(6)(a) After
determining the definition of the affected project area, the department shall
establish a committee comprised of individuals who represent cities and
counties in the affected project area; organizations formed to support or
oppose the project; and users of the project. The committee shall be named the
public-private local involvement committee, and be known as the local
involvement committee.

(b) The members of the
local involvement committee shall be: (i) An elected official from each city
within the affected project area; (ii) an elected official from each county
within the affected project area; (iii) two persons from each county within the
affected project area who represent an organization formed in support of the
project, if the organization exists; (iv) two persons from each county within
the affected project area who represent an organization formed to oppose the
project, if the organization exists; and (v) four public members active in a
statewide transportation organization. If the committee makeup results in an
even number of committee members, there shall be an additional appointment of
an elected official from the county in which all, or the greatest portion of
the project is located.

(c) City and county
elected officials shall be appointed by a majority of the members of the city
or county legislative authorities of each city or county within the affected
project area, respectively. The county legislative authority of each county
within the affected project area shall identify and validate organizations
officially formed in support of or in opposition to the project and shall make
the appointments required under this section from a list submitted by the chair
of the organizations. Public members shall be appointed by the governor. All
appointments to the local involvement committee shall be made and submitted to
the department of transportation no later than January 1, 1996, for projects
selected prior to September 1, 1994, and no later than thirty days after the
affected project area is defined for projects selected after June 30, 1997.
Vacancies in the membership of the local involvement committee shall be filled
by the appointing authority under (b)(i) through (v) of this subsection for
each position on the committee.

(d) The local
involvement committee shall serve in an advisory capacity to the department on
all matters related to the execution of the advisory vote.

(e) Members of the
local involvement committee serve without compensation and may not receive
subsistence, lodging expenses, or travel expenses.

(7) The department
shall conduct a minimum thirty-day public comment period on the definition of
the geographical boundary of the project area. The department, in consultation
with the local involvement committee, shall make adjustments, if required, to
the definition of the geographical boundary of the affected project area, based
on comments received from the public. Within fourteen calendar days after the
public comment period, the department shall set the boundaries of the affected
project area in units no smaller than a precinct as defined in RCW 29.01.120.

(8) The department, in
consultation with the local involvement committee, shall develop a description
for selected project proposals. After developing the description of the
project proposal, the department shall publish the project proposal description
in newspapers of general circulation for seven calendar days in the affected
project area. Within fourteen calendar days after the last day of the
publication of the project proposal description, the department shall transmit
a copy of the map depicting the affected project area and the description of
the project proposal to the county auditor of the county in which any portion
of the affected project area is located.

(9) The department
shall provide the legislative transportation committee with progress reports on
the status of the definition of the affected project area and the description
of the project proposal.

(10) Upon receipt of
the map and the description of the project proposal, the county auditor shall,
within thirty days, verify the precincts that are located within the affected
project area. The county auditor shall prepare the text identifying and
describing the affected project area and the project proposal using the
definition of the geographical boundary of the affected project area and the
project description submitted by the department and shall set an election date
for the submission of a ballot proposition authorizing the imposition of tolls
or user fees to implement the proposed project within the affected project
area, which date may be the next succeeding general election to be held in the
state, or at a special election, if requested by the department. The text of
the project proposal must appear in a voter's pamphlet for the affected project
area. The department shall pay the costs of publication and distribution. The
special election date must be the next date for a special election provided
under RCW 29.13.020 that is at least sixty days but, if authorized under RCW
29.13.020, no more than ninety days after the receipt of the final map and
project description by the auditor. The department shall pay the cost of an
election held under this section.

(11) Notwithstanding
any other provision of law, the department may contract with a private
developer of a selected project proposal to conduct environmental impact
studies, a public involvement program, and engineering and technical studies
funded by the legislature. For projects subject to this subsection, the
department shall not enter into an agreement under RCW 47.46.040 prior to the
advisory vote on the preferred alternative.

(12) Subsections (5)
through (10) of this section shall not apply to project proposals selected
prior to September 1, 1994, that have no organized public opposition as
demonstrated by the submission to the department of original petitions bearing
at least five thousand signatures of individuals opposing the project,
collected and submitted after September 1, 1994, and by thirty calendar days
after June 16, 1995.

(13) Subsections (5)
through (10) of this section shall not apply to project proposals selected
after June 30, 1997, that have no organized public opposition as demonstrated
by the submission to the department of original petitions bearing at least five
thousand signatures of individuals opposing the project, collected and
submitted by ninety calendar days after project selection.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
3. A new section is added
to chapter 47.46 RCW to read as follows:

(1) To the extent that
the legislature specifically appropriates funding for a project developed under
this chapter using the proceeds of bonds issued by the state, an agreement for
the design or construction of the project entered into by the secretary must
incorporate provisions for the financing that fully use the state financing
provided by the appropriation. As provided in section 10 of this act, the
state finance committee shall evaluate proposals for additional bond sales
needed to complete a project.

(2) The secretary shall
amend existing agreements or execute new agreements to comply with subsection
(1) of this section.

(3) If the secretary is
unable to reach agreement with other parties on contractual provisions
providing for state financing, the secretary shall not enter into an agreement,
or shall take no action with respect to an agreement, or shall exercise
termination provisions, whichever option results in the lowest net cost to the
state.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
4. A new section is added
to chapter 47.10 RCW to read as follows:

A maximum of eight
hundred million dollars of the bonds authorized under RCW 47.10.843 are
specifically provided for highway projects developed under chapter 47.46 RCW.
Proceeds from bonds sold in compliance with this allocation may, consistent
with the terms of RCW 47.10.843, be used for location, design, right-of-way,
and construction of state and local highway improvements, including but not
limited to costs allowed by RCW 39.46.070 including all costs related to
financing incurred in providing for bond proceeds for those items.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
5. A new section is added
to chapter 47.46 RCW to read as follows:

The department may
provide for the establishment and construction of public toll bridge facilities
upon any public highways of this state together with approaches to them under
agreements entered into under this chapter to develop such facilities. A public
toll bridge facility authorized under this section includes, but is not limited
to, the construction of an additional toll bridge, including approaches,
adjacent to and within two miles of an existing bridge, the imposition of tolls
on both bridges, and the operation of both bridges as one toll facility.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
6. A new section is added
to chapter 47.46 RCW to read as follows:

(1) A citizen advisory
committee must be created for any project developed under this chapter that
imposes toll charges for use of a transportation facility. The governor shall
appoint nine members to the committee, all of whom must be permanent residents
of the affected project area, as that term is used in RCW 47.46.030.

(2) The citizen advisory
committee shall serve in an advisory capacity to an entity imposing tolls under
this chapter on all matters related to the imposition of tolls. Members of the
committee serve without compensation and may not receive subsistence, lodging
expenses, or travel expenses.

(3) No toll may be
imposed or modified unless the citizen advisory committee has been given at
least twenty days to review and comment on any proposed toll schedule. In
setting toll rates, the toll authority shall give consideration to any
recommendations of the citizen advisory committee.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
7. A new section is added
to chapter 47.46 RCW to read as follows:

The commission shall
fix the rates of toll and other charges for all state‑financed toll
bridges built under this chapter. The commission may change toll charges from
time to time as conditions warrant. In establishing toll charges, the
commission shall give due consideration to any required costs for operating and
maintaining the toll bridge or toll bridges, including the cost of insurance,
and to the amount required annually to meet the redemption of bonds and
interest payments on them. The tolls and charges must at all times be fixed at
rates to yield annual revenue equal to annual operating and maintenance
expenses, except as provided in RCW 47.56.245, including insurance costs and
all redemption payments and interest charges of the bonds issued for any
particular toll bridge or toll bridges as the bonds become due. The bond redemption
and interest payments constitute a first direct and exclusive charge and lien
on all tolls and other revenues and interest on them. Sinking funds created
therefrom received from the use and operation of the toll bridge or toll
bridges, and the tolls and revenues together with the interest earned on them
constitute a trust fund for the payment of the bonds and may not be used or
pledged for any other purpose as long as any of these bonds are outstanding and
unpaid.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
8. A new section is added
to chapter 47.46 RCW to read as follows:

The commission shall
retain toll charges on any existing and future facilities constructed under
this chapter until all costs of investigation, financing, acquisition of property,
and construction advanced from the motor vehicle fund, and obligations incurred
in constructing that facility have been fully paid. Funds specifically
appropriated as a state financial contribution to a project do not require
repayment.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
9. A new section is added
to chapter 47.46 RCW to read as follows:

Pursuant to RCW
43.135.055, the legislature authorizes the transportation commission to
increase bridge tolls in excess of the fiscal growth factor.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
10. A new section is added
to chapter 47.46 RCW to read as follows:

(1) With the exception
of an initial bond sale, the state finance committee shall review proposals for
the sale of state bonds on projects developed under this chapter. If the
finance committee finds that bonds could be issued by a private entity, special
purpose entity, municipality, or nonprofit entity at a lower cost to the toll
payers, the state finance committee shall recommend that the department of
transportation execute an agreement for such sale. In comparing the relative
cost of financing under this section, the finance committee shall review
potential nonstate financing using the same bond sale amount and term of years
as that proposed for the sale of state bonds.

(2) Upon recommendation
of the state finance committee, the department of transportation may finance or
refinance projects developed under this chapter with bonds issued by a private
entity, special purpose entity, municipality, or nonprofit entity.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
11. A new section is added
to chapter 47.46 RCW to read as follows:

Money arising from the
sale of bonds for the purposes authorized under section 5 of this act must be
deposited in the state treasury to the credit of a special account designated
for those purposes. Those funds are available only for the purposes enumerated
in this chapter, for payment of the expense incurred in the issuance and sale
of any such bonds, and to repay the motor vehicle fund for any sums advanced to
pay the cost of surveys, location, design, right‑of‑way, and all
other things necessary for the financing and construction of the bridge and its
approaches.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
12. A new section is added
to chapter 47.46 RCW to read as follows:

A special account to be
known as the Tacoma Narrows toll bridge account is created in the motor vehicle
fund in the state treasury. All proceeds of bonds issued under section 4 of this
act, including any capitalized interest, and at least monthly all of the tolls
and other revenues received from the operation of the toll bridge and from any
interest that may be earned from the deposit or investment of these revenues,
must be deposited into this account. Revenues and interest may be used to pay
any required costs of financing, operation, maintenance, management, and
necessary repairs of the facility.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
13. A new section is added
to chapter 47.46 RCW to read as follows:

Tolls must remain on
the facility for a length of time necessary to repay the motor vehicle fund for
any amounts expended on the design, development, financing, construction,
maintenance, repair, or operation of the Tacoma Narrows toll bridge project.
Funds specifically appropriated as a state financial contribution to the
project do not require repayment.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
14. A new section is added
to chapter 47.46 RCW to read as follows:

If a proposal is
selected for construction under this chapter, subsequent agreements made to
implement the proposal that do not incorporate all the features of the proposal
do not require the solicitation of additional proposals.

Sec. 15. RCW 47.46.040 and 2001 c
64 s 14 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) All projects
designed, constructed, and operated under this authority must comply with all
applicable rules and statutes in existence at the time the agreement is executed,
including but not limited to the following provisions: Chapter 39.12 RCW, this
title, RCW 41.06.380, chapter 47.64 RCW, RCW 49.60.180, and 49 C.F.R. Part 21.

(2) The secretary or a
designee shall consult with legal, financial, and other experts within and
outside state government in the negotiation and development of the agreements.

(3) Agreements ((shall))
may provide for private ownership of the projects during the
construction period. After completion and final acceptance of each project or
discrete segment thereof, the agreement ((shall)) may provide for
state ownership of the transportation systems and facilities and lease to the
private entity unless the state elects to provide for ownership of the facility
by the private entity during the term of the agreement.

The state ((shall))
may lease each of the demonstration projects, or applicable project
segments, to the private entities for operating purposes for up to fifty years.

(4) The department may
exercise any power possessed by it to facilitate the development, construction,
financing operation, and maintenance of transportation projects under this
chapter. Agreements for maintenance services entered into under this section
shall provide for full reimbursement for services rendered by the department or
other state agencies. Agreements for police services for projects, involving
state highway routes, developed under agreements shall be entered into with the
Washington state patrol. The agreement for police services shall provide that
the state patrol will be reimbursed for costs on a comparable basis with the
costs incurred for comparable service on other state highway routes. The
department may provide services for which it is reimbursed, including but not
limited to preliminary planning, environmental certification, and preliminary
design of the demonstration projects.

(5) The plans and
specifications for each project constructed under this section shall comply
with the department's standards for state projects. A facility constructed by and
leased to a private entity is deemed to be a part of the state highway system
for purposes of identification, maintenance, and enforcement of traffic laws
and for the purposes of applicable sections of this title. Upon reversion of
the facility to the state, the project must meet all applicable state
standards. Agreements shall address responsibility for reconstruction or
renovations that are required in order for a facility to meet all applicable
state standards upon reversion of the facility to the state.

(6) For the purpose of
facilitating these projects and to assist the private entity in the financing,
development, construction, and operation of the transportation systems and
facilities, the agreements may include provisions for the department to
exercise its authority, including the lease of facilities, rights of way, and
airspace, exercise of the power of eminent domain, granting of development
rights and opportunities, granting of necessary easements and rights of access,
issuance of permits and other authorizations, protection from competition,
remedies in the event of default of either of the parties, granting of
contractual and real property rights, liability during construction and the
term of the lease, authority to negotiate acquisition of rights of way in
excess of appraised value, and any other provision deemed necessary by the
secretary.

(7) The agreements
entered into under this section may include provisions authorizing the state to
grant necessary easements and lease to a private entity existing rights of way
or rights of way subsequently acquired with public or private financing. The
agreements may also include provisions to lease to the entity airspace above or
below the right of way associated or to be associated with the private entity's
transportation facility. In consideration for the reversion rights in these
privately constructed facilities, the department may negotiate a charge for the
lease of airspace rights during the term of the agreement for a period not to
exceed fifty years. If, after the expiration of this period, the department
continues to lease these airspace rights to the private entity, it shall do so
only at fair market value. The agreement may also provide the private entity
the right of first refusal to undertake projects utilizing airspace owned by
the state in the vicinity of the public-private project.

(8) Agreements under
this section may include any contractual provision that is necessary to protect
the project revenues required to repay the costs incurred to study, plan,
design, finance, acquire, build, install, operate, enforce laws, and maintain
toll highways, bridges, and tunnels and which will not unreasonably inhibit or
prohibit the development of additional public transportation systems and facilities.
Agreements under this section must secure and maintain liability insurance
coverage in amounts appropriate to protect the project's viability and may
address state indemnification of the private entity for design and construction
liability where the state has approved relevant design and construction plans.

(9) Agreements shall
include a process that provides for public involvement in decision making with
respect to the development of the projects.

(10)(a) In carrying out
the public involvement process required in subsection (9) of this section, the
private entity shall proactively seek public participation through a process
appropriate to the characteristics of the project that assesses and
demonstrates public support among: Users of the project, residents of
communities in the vicinity of the project, and residents of communities
impacted by the project.

(b) The private entity
shall conduct a comprehensive public involvement process that provides,
periodically throughout the development and implementation of the project,
users and residents of communities in the affected project area an opportunity
to comment upon key issues regarding the project including, but not limited
to: (i) Alternative sizes and scopes; (ii) design; (iii) environmental assessment;
(iv) right of way and access plans; (v) traffic impacts; (vi) tolling or user
fee strategies and tolling or user fee ranges; (vii) project cost; (viii)
construction impacts; (ix) facility operation; and (x) any other salient
characteristics.

(c) If the affected
project area has not been defined, the private entity shall define the affected
project area by conducting, at a minimum: (i) A comparison of the estimated
percentage of residents of communities in the vicinity of the project and in
other communities impacted by the project who could be subject to tolls or user
fees and the estimated percentage of other users and transient traffic that
could be subject to tolls or user fees; (ii) an analysis of the anticipated
traffic diversion patterns; (iii) an analysis of the potential economic impact
resulting from proposed toll rates or user fee rates imposed on residents,
commercial traffic, and commercial entities in communities in the vicinity of
and impacted by the project; (iv) an analysis of the economic impact of tolls
or user fees on the price of goods and services generally; and (v) an analysis
of the relationship of the project to state transportation needs and benefits.

The agreement may
require an advisory vote by users of and residents in the affected project
area.

(d) In seeking public
participation, the private entity shall establish a local involvement committee
or committees comprised of residents of the affected project area, individuals
who represent cities and counties in the affected project area, organizations
formed to support or oppose the project, if such organizations exist, and users
of the project. The private entity shall, at a minimum, establish a committee
as required under the specifications of RCW 47.46.030(6)(b) (ii) and (iii) and
appointments to such committee shall be made no later than thirty days after
the project area is defined.

(e) Local involvement
committees shall act in an advisory capacity to the department and the private
entity on all issues related to the development and implementation of the
public involvement process established under this section.

(f) The department and
the private entity shall provide the legislative transportation committee and
local involvement committees with progress reports on the status of the public
involvement process including the results of an advisory vote, if any occurs.

(11) Nothing in this
chapter limits the right of the secretary and his or her agents to render such
advice and to make such recommendations as they deem to be in the best
interests of the state and the public.

Sec. 16. RCW 47.46.050 and 1995
2nd sp.s. c 19 s 4 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) The department may
enter into agreements using federal, state, and local financing in connection
with the projects, including without limitation, grants, loans, and other
measures authorized by section 1012 of ISTEA, and to do such things as
necessary and desirable to maximize the funding and financing, including the
formation of a revolving loan fund to implement this section.

(2) Agreements entered
into under this section ((shall)) may authorize the private
entity to lease the facilities within a designated area or areas from the state
and to impose user fees or tolls within the designated area to allow a
reasonable rate of return on investment, as established through a negotiated
agreement between the state and the private entity. The negotiated agreement
shall determine a maximum rate of return on investment, based on project
characteristics. If the negotiated rate of return on investment is not
affected, the private entity may establish and modify toll rates and user fees.

(3) Agreements may
establish "incentive" rates of return beyond the negotiated maximum
rate of return on investment. The incentive rates of return shall be designed
to provide financial benefits to the affected public jurisdictions and the
private entity, given the attainment of various safety, performance, or
transportation demand management goals. The incentive rates of return shall be
negotiated in the agreement.

(4) Agreements ((shall))
that provide for ownership or lease of a facility by a private entity must
require that over the term of the ownership or lease the user fees or toll
revenues be applied only to payment of the ((private entity's)) capital
outlay costs for the project, including project development costs, interest
expense, the costs associated with design, construction, operations, toll
collection, maintenance and administration of the project, reimbursement to the
state for all costs associated with an election as required under RCW
47.46.030, the costs of project review and oversight, technical and law
enforcement services, establishment of a fund to assure the adequacy of
maintenance expenditures, and a reasonable return on investment to the private
entity. A negotiated agreement shall not extend the term of the ownership or
lease beyond the period of time required for payment of the private entity's
capital outlay costs for the project under this subsection.

Sec. 17. RCW 47.46.060 and 1998 c
179 s 4 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) Either the
department of transportation or a private entity that is party to an
agreement under this chapter may apply for deferral of taxes on the site
preparation for, the construction of, the acquisition of any related machinery
and equipment which will become a part of, and the rental of equipment for use
in the state route number 16 corridor improvements project under this chapter.
Application shall be made to the department of revenue in a form and manner
prescribed by the department of revenue. The application shall contain
information regarding estimated or actual costs, time schedules for completion
and operation, and other information required by the department of revenue.
The department of revenue shall approve the application within sixty days if it
meets the requirements of this section.

(2) The department of
revenue shall issue a sales and use tax deferral certificate for state and
local sales and use taxes due under chapters 82.08, 82.12, and 82.14 RCW on the
project. The use of the certificate shall be governed by rules established by
the department of revenue.

(3) The department
of transportation or a private entity granted a tax deferral under this
section shall begin paying the deferred taxes in the fifth year after the date
certified by the department of revenue as the date on which the project is
operationally complete. The first payment is due on December 31st of the fifth
calendar year after such certified date, with subsequent annual payments due on
December 31st of the following nine years. Each payment shall equal ten
percent of the deferred tax.

(4) The department of
revenue may authorize an accelerated repayment schedule upon request of the
department of transportation or a private entity granted a deferral under
this section.

(5) Interest shall not
be charged on any taxes deferred under this section for the period of deferral,
although all other penalties and interest applicable to delinquent excise taxes
may be assessed and imposed for delinquent payments under this section. The
debt for deferred taxes is not extinguished by insolvency or other failure of
the private entity.

(6) Applications and
any other information received by the department of revenue under this section
are not confidential and are subject to disclosure. Chapter 82.32 RCW applies
to the administration of this section.

Sec. 18. RCW 47.56.030 and 2001 c
59 s 1 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) Except as
allowed under chapter 47.46 RCW:

(a) The department
of transportation shall have full charge of the construction of all toll
bridges and other toll facilities including the Washington state ferries, and
the operation and maintenance thereof.

(b) The
transportation commission shall determine and establish the tolls and charges
thereon, and shall perform all duties and exercise all powers relating to the
financing, refinancing, and fiscal management of all toll bridges and other
toll facilities including the Washington state ferries, and bonded indebtedness
in the manner provided by law.

(c) The
department shall have full charge of design of all toll facilities.

(d) Except as
provided in this section, the department shall proceed with the construction of
such toll bridges and other facilities and the approaches thereto by contract
in the manner of state highway construction immediately upon there being made
available funds for such work and shall prosecute such work to completion as
rapidly as practicable. The department is authorized to negotiate contracts
for any amount without bid under (((a))) (d)(i) and (((b)))
(ii) of this subsection:

(((a))) (i)
Emergency contracts, in order to make repairs to ferries or ferry terminal
facilities or removal of such facilities whenever continued use of ferries or
ferry terminal facilities constitutes a real or immediate danger to the
traveling public or precludes prudent use of such ferries or facilities; and

(((b))) (ii)
Single source contracts for vessel dry dockings, when there is clearly and
legitimately only one available bidder to conduct dry dock-related work for a
specific class or classes of vessels. The contracts may be entered into for a
single vessel dry docking or for multiple vessel dry dockings for a period not
to exceed two years.

(2) The department
shall proceed with the procurement of materials, supplies, services, and
equipment needed for the support, maintenance, and use of a ferry, ferry
terminal, or other facility operated by Washington state ferries, in accordance
with chapter 43.19 RCW except as follows:

(a) Except as provided
in (d) of this subsection, when the secretary of the department of
transportation determines in writing that the use of invitation for bid is
either not practicable or not advantageous to the state and it may be necessary
to make competitive evaluations, including technical or performance evaluations
among acceptable proposals to complete the contract award, a contract may be entered
into by use of a competitive sealed proposals method, and a formal request for
proposals solicitation. Such formal request for proposals solicitation shall
include a functional description of the needs and requirements of the state and
the significant factors.

(b) When purchases are
made through a formal request for proposals solicitation the contract shall be
awarded to the responsible proposer whose competitive sealed proposal is
determined in writing to be the most advantageous to the state taking into
consideration price and other evaluation factors set forth in the request for
proposals. No significant factors may be used in evaluating a proposal that
are not specified in the request for proposals. Factors that may be considered
in evaluating proposals include but are not limited to: Price;
maintainability; reliability; commonality; performance levels; life cycle cost
if applicable under this section; cost of transportation or delivery; delivery
schedule offered; installation cost; cost of spare parts; availability of parts
and service offered; and the following:

(i) The ability,
capacity, and skill of the proposer to perform the contract or provide the
service required;

(ii) The character,
integrity, reputation, judgment, experience, and efficiency of the proposer;

(iii) Whether the
proposer can perform the contract within the time specified;

(iv) The quality of
performance of previous contracts or services;

(v) The previous and
existing compliance by the proposer with laws relating to the contract or
services;

(vi) Objective,
measurable criteria defined in the request for proposal. These criteria may
include but are not limited to items such as discounts, delivery costs,
maintenance services costs, installation costs, and transportation costs; and

(vii) Such other
information as may be secured having a bearing on the decision to award the
contract.

(c) When purchases are
made through a request for proposal process, proposals received shall be
evaluated based on the evaluation factors set forth in the request for
proposal. When issuing a request for proposal for the procurement of
propulsion equipment or systems that include an engine, the request for
proposal must specify the use of a life cycle cost analysis that includes an
evaluation of fuel efficiency. When a life cycle cost analysis is used, the
life cycle cost of a proposal shall be given at least the same relative
importance as the initial price element specified in the request of proposal
documents. The department may reject any and all proposals received. If the
proposals are not rejected, the award shall be made to the proposer whose
proposal is most advantageous to the department, considering price and the
other evaluation factors set forth in the request for proposal.

(d) If the department
is procuring large equipment or systems (e.g., electrical, propulsion) needed
for the support, maintenance, and use of a ferry operated by Washington state
ferries, the department shall proceed with a formal request for proposal solicitation
under this subsection (2) without a determination of necessity by the
secretary.

Sec. 19. RCW 47.56.270 and 1983 c
3 s 129 are each amended to read as follows:

The Lake Washington
bridge and the Tacoma Narrows bridge in existence on the effective date of
this act and in chapter 47.17 RCW made a part of the primary state highways
of the state of Washington, shall, upon completion, be operated, maintained,
kept up, and repaired by the department in the manner provided in this chapter,
and the cost of such operation, maintenance, upkeep, and repair shall be paid
from funds appropriated for the use of the department for the construction and
maintenance of the primary state highways of the state of Washington.

Sec. 20. RCW 47.56.271 and 1983 c
3 s 130 are each amended to read as follows:

Except as otherwise
provided in this section, the Tacoma Narrows bridge hereinbefore by the
provisions of RCW 47.17.065 and 47.56.270 made a part of the primary state
highways of the state shall be operated and maintained by the department as a
toll-free facility at such time as the ((present)) bonded indebtedness
relating ((thereto)) to the construction of the Tacoma Narrows bridge
in existence on the effective date of this act is wholly retired and tolls
equaling the ((present)) indebtedness of the toll bridge authority incurred
for the construction of the Tacoma Narrows bridge in existence on the effective
date of this act to the county of Pierce have been collected. Tolls may
only be imposed upon the Tacoma Narrows bridge in existence on the effective
date of this act if that bridge is included as part of a public toll bridge
facility that includes an additional toll bridge adjacent to the existing
bridge constructed under sections 3, 4, 5, and 10 of this act. It is the
express intent of the legislature that the provisions of RCW 47.56.245 (section
47.56.245, chapter 13, Laws of 1961) shall not be applicable to the Tacoma
Narrows bridge in existence on the effective date of this act.

Sec. 21. RCW 39.46.070 and 1983 c
167 s 7 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) Except as
provided in subsection (2) of this section, the proceeds of any bonds
issued by the state or a local government may be used to pay incidental costs
and costs related to the sale and issuance of the bonds. Such costs include
payments for fiscal and legal expenses, obtaining bond ratings, printing,
engraving, advertising, establishing and funding reserve accounts and other
accounts, an amount for working capital, capitalized interest for up to six
months, necessary and related engineering, architectural, planning, and
inspection costs, and other similar activities or purposes.

(2) In addition to
the costs enumerated in subsection (1) of this section, costs authorized under
this section include capitalized interest for up to seventy-two months from the
date of issuance for bonds issued by the state for the construction of a public
toll bridge authority under chapter 47.46 RCW.

Sec. 22. RCW 43.84.092 and 2001 c
273 s 5, 2001 c 141 s 2, and 2001 c 80 s 4 are each reenacted and amended to
read as follows:

(1) All earnings of
investments of surplus balances in the state treasury shall be deposited to the
treasury income account, which account is hereby established in the state
treasury.

(2) The treasury income
account shall be utilized to pay or receive funds associated with federal
programs as required by the federal cash management improvement act of 1990.
The treasury income account is subject in all respects to chapter 43.88 RCW,
but no appropriation is required for refunds or allocations of interest earnings
required by the cash management improvement act. Refunds of interest to the
federal treasury required under the cash management improvement act fall under
RCW 43.88.180 and shall not require appropriation. The office of financial
management shall determine the amounts due to or from the federal government
pursuant to the cash management improvement act. The office of financial
management may direct transfers of funds between accounts as deemed necessary
to implement the provisions of the cash management improvement act, and this
subsection. Refunds or allocations shall occur prior to the distributions of
earnings set forth in subsection (4) of this section.

(3) Except for the
provisions of RCW 43.84.160, the treasury income account may be utilized for
the payment of purchased banking services on behalf of treasury funds
including, but not limited to, depository, safekeeping, and disbursement
functions for the state treasury and affected state agencies. The treasury
income account is subject in all respects to chapter 43.88 RCW, but no
appropriation is required for payments to financial institutions. Payments
shall occur prior to distribution of earnings set forth in subsection (4) of
this section.

(4) Monthly, the state
treasurer shall distribute the earnings credited to the treasury income
account. The state treasurer shall credit the general fund with all the
earnings credited to the treasury income account except:

(a) The following
accounts and funds shall receive their proportionate share of earnings based
upon each account's and fund's average daily balance for the period: The
capitol building construction account, the Cedar River channel construction and
operation account, the Central Washington University capital projects account,
the charitable, educational, penal and reformatory institutions account, the
common school construction fund, the county criminal justice assistance
account, the county sales and use tax equalization account, the data processing
building construction account, the deferred compensation administrative
account, the deferred compensation principal account, the department of
retirement systems expense account, the drinking water assistance account, the
drinking water assistance administrative account, the drinking water assistance
repayment account, the Eastern Washington University capital projects account,
the education construction fund, the emergency reserve fund, the federal forest
revolving account, the health services account, the public health services
account, the health system capacity account, the personal health services
account, the state higher education construction account, the higher education
construction account, the highway infrastructure account, the industrial
insurance premium refund account, the judges' retirement account, the judicial
retirement administrative account, the judicial retirement principal account,
the local leasehold excise tax account, the local real estate excise tax
account, the local sales and use tax account, the medical aid account, the
mobile home park relocation fund, the multimodal transportation account, the
municipal criminal justice assistance account, the municipal sales and use tax
equalization account, the natural resources deposit account, the oyster reserve
land account, the perpetual surveillance and maintenance account, the public
employees' retirement system plan 1 account, the public employees' retirement
system plan 2 account, the public health supplemental account, the Puyallup
tribal settlement account, the resource management cost account, the site
closure account, the special wildlife account, the state employees' insurance
account, the state employees' insurance reserve account, the state investment
board expense account, the state investment board commingled trust fund
accounts, the supplemental pension account, the Tacoma Narrows toll bridge
account, the teachers' retirement system plan 1 account, the teachers'
retirement system combined plan 2 and plan 3 account, the tobacco prevention
and control account, the tobacco settlement account, the transportation
infrastructure account, the tuition recovery trust fund, the University of
Washington bond retirement fund, the University of Washington building account,
the volunteer fire fighters' and reserve officers' relief and pension principal
fund, the volunteer fire fighters' and reserve officers' administrative fund,
the Washington judicial retirement system account, the Washington law
enforcement officers' and fire fighters' system plan 1 retirement account, the
Washington law enforcement officers' and fire fighters' system plan 2
retirement account, the Washington school employees' retirement system combined
plan 2 and 3 account, the Washington state health insurance pool account, the
Washington state patrol retirement account, the Washington State University
building account, the Washington State University bond retirement fund, the
water pollution control revolving fund, and the Western Washington University
capital projects account. Earnings derived from investing balances of the
agricultural permanent fund, the normal school permanent fund, the permanent
common school fund, the scientific permanent fund, and the state university
permanent fund shall be allocated to their respective beneficiary accounts. All
earnings to be distributed under this subsection (4)(a) shall first be reduced
by the allocation to the state treasurer's service fund pursuant to RCW
43.08.190.

(b) The following
accounts and funds shall receive eighty percent of their proportionate share of
earnings based upon each account's or fund's average daily balance for the
period: The aeronautics account, the aircraft search and rescue account, the
county arterial preservation account, the department of licensing services
account, the essential rail assistance account, the ferry bond retirement fund,
the grade crossing protective fund, the high capacity transportation account,
the highway bond retirement fund, the highway safety account, the motor vehicle
fund, the motorcycle safety education account, the pilotage account, the public
transportation systems account, the Puget Sound capital construction account,
the Puget Sound ferry operations account, the recreational vehicle account, the
rural arterial trust account, the safety and education account, the special
category C account, the state patrol highway account, the transportation
equipment fund, the transportation fund, the transportation improvement
account, the transportation improvement board bond retirement account, and the
urban arterial trust account.

(5) In conformance with
Article II, section 37 of the state Constitution, no treasury accounts or funds
shall be allocated earnings without the specific affirmative directive of this
section.

Sec. 23. RCW 43.84.092 and 2001 c
273 s 6, 2001 c 141 s 3, and 2001 c 80 s 5 are each reenacted and amended to
read as follows:

(1) All earnings of
investments of surplus balances in the state treasury shall be deposited to the
treasury income account, which account is hereby established in the state
treasury.

(2) The treasury income
account shall be utilized to pay or receive funds associated with federal
programs as required by the federal cash management improvement act of 1990.
The treasury income account is subject in all respects to chapter 43.88 RCW,
but no appropriation is required for refunds or allocations of interest
earnings required by the cash management improvement act. Refunds of interest
to the federal treasury required under the cash management improvement act fall
under RCW 43.88.180 and shall not require appropriation. The office of
financial management shall determine the amounts due to or from the federal
government pursuant to the cash management improvement act. The office of
financial management may direct transfers of funds between accounts as deemed
necessary to implement the provisions of the cash management improvement act,
and this subsection. Refunds or allocations shall occur prior to the
distributions of earnings set forth in subsection (4) of this section.

(3) Except for the
provisions of RCW 43.84.160, the treasury income account may be utilized for
the payment of purchased banking services on behalf of treasury funds
including, but not limited to, depository, safekeeping, and disbursement
functions for the state treasury and affected state agencies. The treasury
income account is subject in all respects to chapter 43.88 RCW, but no
appropriation is required for payments to financial institutions. Payments
shall occur prior to distribution of earnings set forth in subsection (4) of
this section.

(4) Monthly, the state
treasurer shall distribute the earnings credited to the treasury income
account. The state treasurer shall credit the general fund with all the
earnings credited to the treasury income account except:

(a) The following
accounts and funds shall receive their proportionate share of earnings based
upon each account's and fund's average daily balance for the period: The
capitol building construction account, the Cedar River channel construction and
operation account, the Central Washington University capital projects account,
the charitable, educational, penal and reformatory institutions account, the
common school construction fund, the county criminal justice assistance account,
the county sales and use tax equalization account, the data processing building
construction account, the deferred compensation administrative account, the
deferred compensation principal account, the department of retirement systems
expense account, the drinking water assistance account, the drinking water
assistance administrative account, the drinking water assistance repayment
account, the Eastern Washington University capital projects account, the
education construction fund, the emergency reserve fund, the federal forest
revolving account, the health services account, the public health services
account, the health system capacity account, the personal health services
account, the state higher education construction account, the higher education construction
account, the highway infrastructure account, the industrial insurance premium
refund account, the judges' retirement account, the judicial retirement
administrative account, the judicial retirement principal account, the local
leasehold excise tax account, the local real estate excise tax account, the
local sales and use tax account, the medical aid account, the mobile home park
relocation fund, the multimodal transportation account, the municipal criminal
justice assistance account, the municipal sales and use tax equalization
account, the natural resources deposit account, the oyster reserve land
account, the perpetual surveillance and maintenance account, the public
employees' retirement system plan 1 account, the public employees' retirement
system combined plan 2 and plan 3 account, the public health supplemental
account, the Puyallup tribal settlement account, the resource management cost
account, the site closure account, the special wildlife account, the state
employees' insurance account, the state employees' insurance reserve account,
the state investment board expense account, the state investment board
commingled trust fund accounts, the supplemental pension account, the Tacoma
Narrows toll bridge account, the teachers' retirement system plan 1
account, the teachers' retirement system combined plan 2 and plan 3 account,
the tobacco prevention and control account, the tobacco settlement account, the
transportation infrastructure account, the tuition recovery trust fund, the
University of Washington bond retirement fund, the University of Washington
building account, the volunteer fire fighters' and reserve officers' relief and
pension principal fund, the volunteer fire fighters' and reserve officers'
administrative fund, the Washington judicial retirement system account, the
Washington law enforcement officers' and fire fighters' system plan 1
retirement account, the Washington law enforcement officers' and fire fighters'
system plan 2 retirement account, the Washington school employees' retirement
system combined plan 2 and 3 account, the Washington state health insurance
pool account, the Washington state patrol retirement account, the Washington
State University building account, the Washington State University bond
retirement fund, the water pollution control revolving fund, and the Western
Washington University capital projects account. Earnings derived from
investing balances of the agricultural permanent fund, the normal school
permanent fund, the permanent common school fund, the scientific permanent
fund, and the state university permanent fund shall be allocated to their
respective beneficiary accounts. All earnings to be distributed under this
subsection (4)(a) shall first be reduced by the allocation to the state
treasurer's service fund pursuant to RCW 43.08.190.

(b) The following
accounts and funds shall receive eighty percent of their proportionate share of
earnings based upon each account's or fund's average daily balance for the
period: The aeronautics account, the aircraft search and rescue account, the
county arterial preservation account, the department of licensing services
account, the essential rail assistance account, the ferry bond retirement fund,
the grade crossing protective fund, the high capacity transportation account,
the highway bond retirement fund, the highway safety account, the motor vehicle
fund, the motorcycle safety education account, the pilotage account, the public
transportation systems account, the Puget Sound capital construction account,
the Puget Sound ferry operations account, the recreational vehicle account, the
rural arterial trust account, the safety and education account, the special
category C account, the state patrol highway account, the transportation
equipment fund, the transportation fund, the transportation improvement
account, the transportation improvement board bond retirement account, and the
urban arterial trust account.

(5) In conformance with
Article II, section 37 of the state Constitution, no treasury accounts or funds
shall be allocated earnings without the specific affirmative directive of this
section.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
24. A new section is added
to chapter 47.46 RCW to read as follows:

A legislative oversight
committee is established to monitor and report on the progress, execution, and
efficiency of design-build contracts issued under this chapter. The
legislative oversight committee will be comprised of one legislator from each
caucus of each chamber of the legislature. The leadership of each caucus shall
appoint one member from his or her respective caucus to serve on the
legislative oversight committee authorized by this section.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
25. The legislature finds and
declares:

It is in the interest
of the state and the traveling public to improve the safety and efficiency of
state highways and bridges as expeditiously as possible. The existing Tacoma
Narrows bridge section of the SR 16 corridor located in Pierce and Kitsap
counties, among others, is a threat to public health and safety because of
congestion and a high number of accidents, injuries, and fatalities. Millions
of dollars are lost annually because of travel delays and accidents that cause
personal and property damage.

The SR 16 corridor
provides the only fixed roadway link crossing Puget Sound. SR 16 is classified
as an urban principal arterial and a highway of statewide significance because
it serves substantial statewide and interstate travel. Further, its national
highway system designation as a major strategic highway connector identifies SR
16 as part of the network of highways that is important to the United States
strategic defense policy providing defense access, continuity, and emergency
capabilities for the movement of personnel, materials, and equipment.

The SR 16 corridor is
vital to the economic well‑being of Pierce and Kitsap counties and the
Olympic peninsula. SR 16 is a designated state freight corridor, allowing for
the efficient movement of freight, goods, and services to support local,
regional, and state economies.

The SR 16 corridor
project includes the financing, right‑of‑way acquisition, design‑build
construction, operations, and maintenance of a new suspension toll bridge at
Tacoma Narrows parallel to the existing bridge and the reconfiguration and
seismic rehabilitation of the current bridge. Roadway improvements will also
be made on SR 16 from and to the approaches to the bridge.

Currently, the state
highway systems plan does not provide any funding solution for this critical
transportation project other than tolls. Under RCW 47.46.040, the project has
received regulatory approvals, rights‑of‑way have been acquired,
necessary preparations for financing are underway, and a design‑build
construction price has been determined. There have been significant state
appropriations and private funding advanced to develop the project. Delays in
commencing this project will cause increases in construction and financing
costs and present a clear danger that the state will not be able to proceed to
make these vital transportation improvements. This will result in a
detrimental effect on the safety of its citizens and the economic welfare of the
region.

In order to avoid these
profound risks, including the profound risk of the project not proceeding,
which would adversely affect tens of thousands of citizens, it is necessary
that this act be effective immediately. Immediate legislative action is a
pressing necessity to support the immediate commencement of work on this
project and the SR 16 corridor.

These facts and
findings are a declaration of facts constituting an emergency, and the projects
that will be able to proceed under this act are necessary for immediate
preservation of the public health, safety, and welfare. Therefore, except for
section 23 of this act, this act takes effect immediately. Section 23 of this
act takes effect March 1, 2002.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 26. Section 22 of this act
expires March 1, 2002.

---
END ---