BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF
WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1. RCW 36.70A.130 and 1997
c 429 s 10 are each amended to read as follows:

(1)(a) Each
comprehensive land use plan and development regulations shall be subject to
continuing review and evaluation by the county or city that adopted them. ((Not
later than September 1, 2002, and at least every five years thereafter,)) A
county or city planning under RCW 36.70A.040 shall take action to review
and, if needed, revise its comprehensive land use plan and development
regulations to ensure that the plan and regulations ((are complying)) comply
with the requirements of this chapter according to the time periods
specified in subsection (4) of this section. A county or city not planning
under RCW 36.70A.040 shall take action to review and, if needed, revise its
policies and development regulations regarding critical areas and natural
resource lands adopted according to this chapter to ensure that these policies
and regulations comply with the requirements of this chapter according to the
time periods specified in subsection (4) of this section. The review and
evaluation required by this subsection may be combined with the review required
by subsection (3) of this section.

(b) Any
amendment of or revision to a comprehensive land use plan shall conform
to this chapter((, and)). Any ((change)) amendment of
or revision to development regulations shall be consistent with and
implement the comprehensive plan.

(2)(a) Each county and
city shall establish and broadly disseminate to the public a public
participation program identifying procedures whereby proposed amendments or
revisions of the comprehensive plan are considered by the governing body of the
county or city no more frequently than once every year ((except that)).
Amendments may be considered more frequently than once per year
under the following circumstances:

(i) The initial
adoption of a subarea plan;

(ii) The adoption or
amendment of a shoreline master program under the procedures set forth in
chapter 90.58 RCW; and

(iii) The amendment of
the capital facilities element of a comprehensive plan that occurs concurrently
with the adoption or amendment of a county or city budget.

(b) Except as otherwise
provided in (a) of this subsection, all proposals shall be considered by the
governing body concurrently so the cumulative effect of the various proposals
can be ascertained. However, after appropriate public participation a county
or city may adopt amendments or revisions to its comprehensive plan that
conform with this chapter whenever an emergency exists or to resolve an appeal
of a comprehensive plan filed with a growth management hearings board or with
the court.

(3) Each county that
designates urban growth areas under RCW 36.70A.110 shall review, at least every
ten years, its designated urban growth area or areas, and the densities
permitted within both the incorporated and unincorporated portions of each
urban growth area. In conjunction with this review by the county, each city
located within an urban growth area shall review the densities permitted within
its boundaries, and the extent to which the urban growth occurring within the
county has located within each city and the unincorporated portions of the
urban growth areas. The county comprehensive plan designating urban growth
areas, and the densities permitted in the urban growth areas by the
comprehensive plans of the county and each city located within the urban growth
areas, shall be revised to accommodate the urban growth projected to occur in
the county for the succeeding twenty-year period. The review required by this
subsection may be combined with the review and evaluation required by RCW
36.70A.215.

(4) The department
shall establish a schedule for counties and cities to conduct the review and
evaluation required by subsection (1) of this section. The schedule
established by the department shall provide for the reviews and evaluations to
be completed as follows:

(a) On or before the
following dates, and at least every five years thereafter, for Clark, King,
Kitsap, Pierce, Snohomish, and Thurston counties and the cities within those
counties:

(i) December 1,
2003, for policies and regulations regarding critical areas. However, any
amendments to these policies and regulations adopted as a result of this review
and evaluation shall not be effective before July 1, 2004; and

(ii) July 1, 2004,
for policies, comprehensive plans, and development regulations other than
policies and regulations regarding critical areas that are adopted according to
this chapter;

(b) On or before
December 1, 2004, and at least every ten years thereafter, for Clallam,
Jefferson, and Whatcom counties and the cities within those counties;

(c) On or before
December 1, 2005, and at least every ten years thereafter, for Cowlitz, Island,
Lewis, Mason, San Juan, Skagit, and Skamania counties and the cities within
those counties;

(d) On or before
December 1, 2006, and at least every ten years thereafter, for Benton, Chelan,
Douglas, Grant, Kittitas, Spokane, and Yakima counties and the cities within
those counties; and

(e) On or before
December 1, 2007, and at least every ten years thereafter, for Adams, Asotin,
Columbia, Ferry, Franklin, Garfield, Grays Harbor, Klickitat, Lincoln,
Okanogan, Pacific, Pend Oreille, Stevens, Wahkiakum, Walla Walla, and Whitman
counties and the cities within those counties.

(5) Nothing in this
section precludes a county or city from conducting the review and evaluation
required by this section before the time limits established in subsection (4)
of this section. Counties and cities may begin this process early and may be
eligible for grants from the department, subject to available funding, if they
elect to do so.

(6) A county or city
subject to the time periods in subsection (4)(a) of this section that, pursuant
to an ordinance adopted by the county or city establishing a schedule for
periodic review of its comprehensive plan and development regulations, has
conducted a review and evaluation of its comprehensive plan and development
regulations and, on or after January 1, 2001, has taken action in response to
that review and evaluation shall be deemed to have conducted the first review
required by subsection (4)(a) of this section. Subsequent review and
evaluation by the county or city of its comprehensive plan and development
regulations shall be conducted in accordance with the time periods established
under subsection (4)(a) of this section.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
2. A new section is added
to chapter 90.58 RCW to read as follows:

(1) The guidelines
adopted by the department and master programs developed or amended by local
governments according to RCW 90.58.080 shall not require modification of or
limit agricultural activities occurring on agricultural lands. In
jurisdictions where agricultural activities occur, master programs developed or
amended after the effective date of this act shall include provisions
addressing new agricultural activities on land not meeting the definition of
agricultural land, conversion of agricultural lands to other uses, and
development not meeting the definition of agricultural activities. Nothing in
this section limits or changes the terms of the current exception to the
definition of substantial development in RCW 90.58.030(3)(e)(iv).

(2) For the purposes of
this section:

(a) "Agricultural
activities" means agricultural uses and practices including, but not
limited to: Producing, breeding, or increasing agricultural products; rotating
and changing agricultural crops; allowing land used for agricultural activities
to lie fallow in which it is plowed and tilled but left unseeded; allowing land
used for agricultural activities to lie dormant as a result of adverse
agricultural market conditions; allowing land used for agricultural activities
to lie dormant because the land is enrolled in a local, state, or federal
conservation program, or the land is subject to a conservation easement;
conducting agricultural operations; maintaining, repairing, and replacing
agricultural equipment; maintaining, repairing, and replacing agricultural
facilities, provided that the replacement facility is no closer to the
shoreline than the original facility; and maintaining agricultural lands under
production or cultivation;

(b) "Agricultural
products" includes but is not limited to horticultural, viticultural,
floricultural, vegetable, fruit, berry, grain, hops, hay, straw, turf, sod,
seed, and apiary products; feed or forage for livestock; Christmas trees;
hybrid cottonwood and similar hardwood trees grown as crops and harvested
within twenty years of planting; and livestock including both the animals
themselves and animal products including but not limited to meat, upland
finfish, poultry and poultry products, and dairy products;

(c) "Agricultural
equipment" and "agricultural facilities" includes, but is not
limited to: (i) The following used in agricultural operations: Equipment;
machinery; constructed shelters, buildings, and ponds; fences; upland finfish
rearing facilities; water diversion, withdrawal, conveyance, and use equipment
and facilities including but not limited to pumps, pipes, tapes, canals,
ditches, and drains; (ii) corridors and facilities for transporting personnel,
livestock, and equipment to, from, and within agricultural lands; (iii) farm
residences and associated equipment, lands, and facilities; and (iv) roadside
stands and on-farm markets for marketing fruit or vegetables; and

(d) "Agricultural
land" means those specific land areas on which agricultural activities are
conducted.

(3) The
department and local governments shall assure that local shoreline master
programs use definitions consistent with the definitions in this section.

---
END ---