BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF
WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec.
1. The sum of seven hundred
fifty thousand dollars, or as much thereof as may be necessary, is appropriated
from the motor vehicle account--state to the attorney general's office for the
biennium ending June 30, 2003, to provide additional legal services to the
department of transportation to expedite renegotiation of a construction
contract for the Tacoma Narrows bridge public-private initiative project.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
2. The sum of three hundred
seventy million dollars in proceeds from the sale of bonds authorized in RCW
47.10.834 is appropriated from the Tacoma Narrows toll bridge account--state to
the department of transportation for the biennium ending June 30, 2003, for
construction of the Tacoma Narrows bridge public-private initiative project,
including but not limited to costs of preliminary engineering, acquisition of
right-of-way, costs associated with financing, construction of the bridge, and
related highway improvements.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
3. The department of
transportation may transfer funds from the Tacoma Narrows toll bridge account
to the motor vehicle account--state as necessary to reimburse expenditures made
from the motor vehicle account‑-state to fund construction and necessary
related costs for the Tacoma Narrows bridge public-private initiative project.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 4. This act is necessary for
the immediate preservation of the public peace, health, or safety, or support
of the state government and its existing public institutions, and takes effect
July 1, 2001.

---
END ---