BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF
WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec.
1. The legislature finds
that natural disasters often cause individuals to lose wages from employment or
income from self-employment, and that natural disasters adversely affect these
individuals and their families with great severity. The legislature intends to
help alleviate the hardships that result from natural disasters by providing
partial wage and income replacement benefits to individuals unable to work as a
result of natural disasters for whom no other wage or income replacement
programs are available.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
2. The definitions in this
section apply throughout this title unless the context clearly requires
otherwise.

(1) "Base
year" means the same as in RCW 50.04.020 and, with respect to a
self-employed individual, the previous calendar year.

(2)
"Commissioner" means the same as in RCW 50.04.060.

(3)
"Employer" means the same as in RCW 50.04.080.

(4)
"Employment" means the same as the term is used in chapter 50.04 RCW,
and that is covered under Title 50 RCW.

(5) "Natural
disaster" means specified unusual and adverse weather conditions or other
natural phenomena that cause the governor: (a) To proclaim a state of
emergency in the affected county or counties under RCW 43.06.010; and (b) to
direct the commissioner to pay natural disaster benefits under this title.

(6) "Natural
disaster area" means the county or counties in which the state of
emergency is proclaimed by the governor.

(7) "Natural
disaster benefit period" means the period beginning with the first week
following the date the state of emergency is proclaimed by the governor, and
ending with the thirtieth week following that date.

(8) "Natural
disaster benefits" means benefits paid under section 101 of this act.

(9) "Natural
disaster benefits trust account" means the trust account created under
section 201 of this act.

(10) "Natural
disaster-impacted self-employed individual" means an individual who was
self-employed in or was to commence self-employment in the natural disaster
area at the time the natural disaster began, and whose principal source of income
and livelihood is dependent upon the individual's performance of service in the
individual's own business, or on the individual's own farm, and whose
unemployment is a direct result of the natural disaster.

(11) "Natural
disaster-impacted worker" means an individual who was employed in or was
to commence employment in the natural disaster area at the time the natural
disaster began, and whose principal source of income and livelihood is
dependent upon the individual's employment for wages, and whose unemployment is
a direct result of the natural disaster. An individual who had a bona fide
offer of work before the natural disaster benefit period and who is not
employed as a direct result of the natural disaster is an individual who was to
commence employment.

(12)
"Self-employed individual" means an individual whose primary reliance
for income is on the performance of services in the individual's own business,
or on the individual's own farm.

(13)
"Unemployment" means:

(a) For a natural
disaster-impacted worker, when the individual performs no work and earns no
wages, or has less than full-time work and earns wages not exceeding the amount
permitted in RCW 50.20.130; and

(b) For a natural
disaster-impacted self-employed individual, when the individual earns less than
his or her customary wages as a direct result of the major disaster, and earns
wages not exceeding the amount permitted in RCW 50.20.130.

(14) "Unusual and
adverse weather conditions or natural phenomena" includes:

(a) A major single natural
occurrence or event such as an earthquake, tornado, or volcanic eruption;

(b) A single storm, or
series of storms, accompanied by severe hail, excessive rain, heavy snow, ice,
or high wind;

(c) An electrical
storm; or

(d) A severe weather
pattern over a period of time that, due to excessive rainfall, unusual lack of
rainfall, or periods of high or low temperatures, causes flooding, substantial
water damage, drought, or freezing, or results in the spreading and flourishing
of insects or pests, or in plant or animal diseases spreading into epidemic
proportions, or prevents the control of fire, however caused.

(15) "Wages"
means the same as in RCW 50.04.320(2) and, with respect to a self-employed
individual, net income from services performed in self-employment in the
previous calendar year.

(16) "Week"
means the same as in RCW 50.04.360.

PART
I

BENEFITS

NEW SECTION. Sec.
101. (1) The commissioner may
pay natural disaster benefits from the natural disaster benefits trust account
created in section 201 of this act, but may not obligate expenditures beyond
the limits set by the legislature in an appropriations act. Natural disaster
benefits may not be paid from the unemployment trust fund, the accident fund,
or the medical aid fund.

The commissioner must
develop a process to ensure that expenditures under this section do not exceed
available funds and to prioritize access to funds when again available. The
commissioner may not pay or otherwise obligate the payment of benefits after
the natural disaster period ends.

(2) Subject to
availability of funds and except as provided in subsection (3) of this section,
natural disaster benefits are available for an individual with respect to a
week of unemployment if:

(a) The week of
unemployment begins during a natural disaster benefit period;

(b) The individual is a
natural disaster-impacted worker or a natural disaster-impacted self-employed
individual;

(c) The individual
works in a natural disaster area;

(d) The individual's
unemployment with respect to that week is a direct result of the natural
disaster;

(e) The individual
filed a timely initial application for natural disaster benefits. An initial
application filed under this section is timely if filed within thirty days
after the date the natural disaster is proclaimed by the governor or within
thirty days after the effective date of this act, whichever is later;

(f) The individual
satisfies the benefit eligibility conditions set forth in RCW 50.20.010(3). A
natural disaster-impacted self-employed individual is deemed to satisfy these
conditions if the individual performs service or activities that are solely for
the purpose of enabling the individual to resume self-employment; and

(g) The individual is
eligible to work in the United States, and the commissioner has verified the
individual's eligibility.

(3) Subject to
availability of funds and in lieu of benefits under subsection (2) of this
section, natural disaster benefits are available in a single payment for an
individual with respect to a natural disaster benefit period if:

(a) The unemployment
begins during a natural disaster benefit period;

(b) The individual is a
natural disaster-impacted self-employed individual;

(c) The individual
works in a natural disaster area;

(d) The individual's
unemployment is a direct result of the natural disaster;

(e) The individual
filed a timely initial application for natural disaster benefits, and elected
to receive benefits in a single payment;

(f) The individual
performs services or activities that are solely for the purpose of enabling the
individual to resume self-employment during the natural disaster benefit
period; and

(g) The individual is
eligible to work in the United States, and the commissioner has verified the
individual's eligibility.

(4) An individual is
not eligible for natural disaster benefits if he or she:

(a) Is or was eligible
for benefits, under Title 50 RCW, or benefits under similar federal or other
state law, whether or not the individual has exhausted such benefits or been
disqualified from receiving such benefits;

(b) Is a standby
claimant who expects recall to his or her regular employer;

(c) Has a definite
recall date that is within six months of the date he or she was laid off; or

(d) Is unemployed due
to a regular seasonal layoff which demonstrates a pattern of unemployment
consistent with RCW 50.20.015.

(5) An individual is
disqualified for natural disaster benefits if he or she was an employee who is
disqualified for benefits under chapter 50.20 RCW. An individual who is
disqualified for natural disaster benefits under this subsection is
disqualified under the same terms and conditions as if he or she was
disqualified for benefits under chapter 50.20 RCW, except that the individual
must not be requalified for natural disaster benefits in any circumstances.

(6) No otherwise
eligible natural disaster-impacted self-employed individual may be denied
benefits because the individual is in training with the approval of the
commissioner, nor may such individual be denied benefits because the individual
is satisfactorily progressing in a training program with the approval of the
commissioner by reason of the application of subsection (2)(f), (3)(f), or (5)
of this section.

(7) All base year
employers are interested parties to the approval and granting of benefits under
this title.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
102. (1) For benefits payable
to individuals under section 101(2) of this act:

(a) The maximum amounts
of benefits payable are the same as the maximum amount of benefits payable
under RCW 50.20.120(1); and

(b) The weekly benefit
amounts payable under section 101 of this act are the same as the weekly amount
payable during the applicable benefit year under RCW 50.20.120(2).

(2) For benefits
payable to individuals under section 101(3) of this act, the amount payable is
equal to thirty times the weekly amount payable during the applicable benefit
year under RCW 50.20.120(2) or one-third of the individual's base year wages
under this title.

(3) Except as provided
for in section 101 of this act, the commissioner shall pay benefits under
section 101 of this act under the same terms and conditions as benefits payable
under chapter 50.20 RCW.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
103. (1) An individual filing
a new claim for natural disaster benefits under this title must, at the time of
filing the claim, disclose whether or not the individual owes child support
obligations. If the individual discloses that he or she owes child support
obligations and is determined to be eligible for benefits, the commissioner
must notify the state or local child support enforcement agency enforcing those
obligations that the individual has been determined to be eligible for natural
disaster benefits.

(2) The commissioner
must deduct and withhold from any benefits payable to an individual who owes
child support obligations:

(a) The amount
specified by the individual to the commissioner to be deducted and withheld
under this subsection, if neither (b) nor (c) of this subsection is applicable;

(b) The amount, if any,
determined under an agreement submitted to the commissioner under section
454(20)(B)(i) of the social security act by the state or local child support
enforcement agency, unless (c) of this subsection is applicable; or

(c) Any amount
otherwise required to be so deducted and withheld from such benefits pursuant
to legal process, as that term is defined in section 462(e) of the social
security act, properly served upon the commissioner.

(3) Any amount deducted
and withheld under subsection (2) of this section must be paid by the
commissioner to the appropriate state or local child support enforcement
agency.

(4) Any amount deducted
and withheld under subsection (2) of this section must be treated for all
purposes as if it were paid to the individual as natural disaster benefits and
paid by that individual to the state or local child support enforcement agency
in satisfaction of the individual's child support obligations.

(5) This section
applies only if appropriate arrangements have been made for reimbursement by
the state or local child support enforcement agency for the administrative
costs incurred by the commissioner under this section that are attributable to
child support obligations being enforced by the state or local child support
enforcement agency.

(6) The definitions in
this subsection apply throughout this section unless the context clearly
requires otherwise.

(a) "Child support
obligations" means only those obligations that are being enforced under a
plan described in section 454 of the social security act that has been approved
by the secretary of health and human services under part D of Title IV of the
social security act.

(b) "State or
local child support enforcement agency" means any agency of this state or
a political subdivision thereof operating pursuant to a plan described in (a)
of this subsection.

PART
II

FUNDING

NEW SECTION. Sec.
201. (1) A natural disaster
benefits trust account is established as a separate account, identifiable and
apart from all public money or funds of this state, which must be administered
by the commissioner of the employment security department exclusively for the
purposes of this title, and to which RCW 43.01.050 is not applicable. All
money designated for the natural disaster benefits trust account from
appropriations and from other sources must be deposited into the account.
Money deposited in the natural disaster benefits trust account is held in trust
by the state and expenditures from the account may be used only to pay natural
disaster benefits and to administer the natural disaster benefits program
established in this title and the natural disaster benefits trust account.
Except to pay benefits, money in the account may be spent only after
appropriation.

(2)(a) The commissioner
must designate a treasurer and custodian of the natural disaster benefits trust
account who must administer such funds in accordance with the directions of the
commissioner and must issue his or her warrants upon them in accordance with
such regulations as the commissioner prescribes. Money in the natural disaster
benefits trust account must not be commingled with other state funds, but must
be deposited by the treasurer, under the direction of the commissioner, in any
bank or public depository in which general funds of the state may be deposited,
but no public deposit insurance charge or premium may be paid out of the fund.
Such money must be secured by the bank or public depository to the same extent
and in the same manner as required by the general depository law of the state
and collateral pledged must be maintained in a separate custody account.

(b) The treasurer must
give a bond conditioned upon the faithful performance of his or her duties as a
custodian of the funds in an amount fixed by the director of the department of
general administration and in a form prescribed by law or approved by the attorney
general. Premiums for the bond must be paid from the natural disaster benefits
trust account. All sums recovered on official bonds for losses sustained by
the natural disaster benefits trust account must be deposited in the account.

(3)(a) The state
investment board has the full power to invest, reinvest, manage, contract,
sell, or exchange investment money in the natural disaster benefits trust
account. All investment and operating costs associated with the investment of
money must be paid as required by RCW 43.33A.160 and 43.84.160. With the
exception of these expenses, the earnings from the investment of the money must
be retained by the account.

(b) All investments
made by the state investment board must be made with the exercise of that degree
of judgment and care required under RCW 43.33A.140 and the investment policies
established by the state investment board.

(c) As deemed
appropriate by the state investment board, money in the account may be
commingled for investment with other funds subject to investment by the board.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
202. A new section is added
to chapter 43.33A RCW to read as follows:

Pursuant to section 201
of this act, the state investment board must invest money in the natural
disaster benefits trust account established in section 201 of this act with
full power to establish investment policies for the account.

Sec. 203. RCW 43.88.180 and 1973
1st ex.s. c 100 s 8 are each amended to read as follows:

Appropriations shall
not be required for refunds, as provided in RCW 43.88.170, nor in the case of
payments other than for administrative expenses or capital improvements to be
made from trust funds specifically created by law to discharge awards, claims,
annuities and other liabilities of the state. Said trust funds shall include,
but shall not be limited to, the accident fund, medical aid fund, natural
disaster benefits trust account, retirement system fund, Washington state
patrol retirement fund and unemployment trust fund. Appropriations may be
required in the case of public service enterprises defined for the purposes of
this section as proprietary functions conducted by an agency of the state. An
appropriation may be required to permit payment of obligations by revolving
funds, as provided in RCW 43.88.190.

PART
III

ADMINISTRATION

NEW SECTION. Sec.
301. When a natural disaster
causes the governor to proclaim a state of emergency and to direct the
commissioner to pay natural disaster benefits under this title, the governor
must notify the secretary of the senate and the chief clerk of the house of
representatives. Within thirty days after the end of a natural disaster
benefit period, the governor must also notify the appropriate committees of the
legislature of the amount of benefits paid under this title, the number of
claimants who received benefits under this title, and other related information
requested by the legislative committees.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
302. The commissioner may
adopt rules necessary to implement this title.

PART
IV

MISCELLANEOUS

NEW SECTION. Sec.
401. The sum of
. . . . . . dollars, or as much thereof as may be
necessary, is appropriated for the biennium ending June 30, 2003, from the
. . . . . . fund to the natural disaster benefits
trust account created in section 201 of this act for the purposes of this act.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
402. The governor may transfer
money from the governor's emergency fund to the natural disaster benefits trust
account created in section 201 of this act.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
403. This act applies
beginning with weeks of unemployment beginning after March 1, 2001.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
404. Part headings used in
this act are not any part of the law.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
405. If any part of this act
is found to be in conflict with federal requirements that are a prescribed
condition to the allocation of federal funds to the state or the eligibility of
employers in this state for federal unemployment tax credits, the conflicting
part of this act is inoperative solely to the extent of the conflict, and the
finding or determination does not affect the operation of the remainder of this
act. Rules adopted under this act must meet federal requirements that are a
necessary condition to the receipt of federal funds by the state or the
granting of federal unemployment tax credits to employers in this state.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
406. If any provision of this
act or its application to any person or circumstance is held invalid, the
remainder of the act or the application of the provision to other persons or
circumstances is not affected.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
407. This act is necessary for
the immediate preservation of the public peace, health, or safety, or support
of the state government and its existing public institutions, and takes effect
immediately.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 408. Sections 1, 2, 101
through 103, 201, 301, and 302 of this act constitute a new title in the
Revised Code of Washington.

---
END ---