BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF
WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec.
1. The legislature finds
that the agricultural industry is vital to the economy of the state and the
welfare of its citizens. The legislature further finds that catastrophic
natural events such as storms, fires, and floods can place the viability of
significant segments of the agricultural industry at risk, and that such events
jeopardize the economic well-being of the state and the public welfare. The legislature
accordingly declares that providing disaster relief to help restore significant
segments of the agricultural industry having suffered catastrophic loss from
the storm that occurred on June 26 and 27, 2001, is an essential public purpose
and public function.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
2. (1) The crop damage
management account is created in the custody of the state treasurer. Amounts
appropriated from the Nisqually earthquake account will be deposited in the
account. Expenditures from the account may be used only for damage caused by
the severe storm, a natural disaster, that occurred on June 26 and 27, 2001,
which damaged crops in thirteen counties designated by the governor and the
secretary of the United States department of agriculture. Only the director of
the department of agriculture or the director's designee may authorize
expenditures from the account. The account is subject to allotment procedures
under chapter 43.88 RCW, but an appropriation is not required for expenditures.

(2) The department of
agriculture shall develop criteria for distributing amounts appropriated to the
account to affected farmers in the form of limited financial assistance. The
criteria shall designate a minimum of three levels of limited financial
assistance, based on the severity of actual damages. The department of
agriculture shall consult with affected farmer groups in developing the levels
of limited financial assistance.

(3) The department of
agriculture is exempt from the requirements of chapter 19.85 RCW for any rule
adopted to administer this limited financial assistance program.

(4) To be eligible for
limited financial assistance, a farmer must first apply for and qualify for an
emergency loan from the farm service agency of the United States department of
agriculture.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
3. The sum of seven million
dollars, or as much thereof as may be necessary, is appropriated for the fiscal
year ending June 30, 2002, from the Nisqually earthquake account to the crop
damage management account for the purposes specified under section 1 of this
act.

Sec. 4. RCW 43.84.092 and 2001
2nd sp.s. c 14 s 607, 2001 c 273 s 5, 2001 c 141 s 2, and 2001 c 80 s 4 are
each reenacted and amended to read as follows:

(1) All earnings of
investments of surplus balances in the state treasury shall be deposited to the
treasury income account, which account is hereby established in the state
treasury.

(2) The treasury income
account shall be utilized to pay or receive funds associated with federal
programs as required by the federal cash management improvement act of 1990.
The treasury income account is subject in all respects to chapter 43.88 RCW,
but no appropriation is required for refunds or allocations of interest
earnings required by the cash management improvement act. Refunds of interest
to the federal treasury required under the cash management improvement act fall
under RCW 43.88.180 and shall not require appropriation. The office of
financial management shall determine the amounts due to or from the federal
government pursuant to the cash management improvement act. The office of
financial management may direct transfers of funds between accounts as deemed
necessary to implement the provisions of the cash management improvement act,
and this subsection. Refunds or allocations shall occur prior to the
distributions of earnings set forth in subsection (4) of this section.

(3) Except for the
provisions of RCW 43.84.160, the treasury income account may be utilized for
the payment of purchased banking services on behalf of treasury funds
including, but not limited to, depository, safekeeping, and disbursement
functions for the state treasury and affected state agencies. The treasury income
account is subject in all respects to chapter 43.88 RCW, but no appropriation
is required for payments to financial institutions. Payments shall occur prior
to distribution of earnings set forth in subsection (4) of this section.

(4) Monthly, the state
treasurer shall distribute the earnings credited to the treasury income
account. The state treasurer shall credit the general fund with all the
earnings credited to the treasury income account except:

(a) The following
accounts and funds shall receive their proportionate share of earnings based
upon each account's and fund's average daily balance for the period: The
capitol building construction account, the Cedar River channel construction and
operation account, the Central Washington University capital projects account,
the charitable, educational, penal and reformatory institutions account, the
common school construction fund, the county criminal justice assistance
account, the county sales and use tax equalization account, the crop damage
management account, the data processing building construction account, the
deferred compensation administrative account, the deferred compensation
principal account, the department of retirement systems expense account, the
drinking water assistance account, the drinking water assistance administrative
account, the drinking water assistance repayment account, the Eastern
Washington University capital projects account, the education construction
fund, the emergency reserve fund, the federal forest revolving account, the
health services account, the public health services account, the health system
capacity account, the personal health services account, the state higher
education construction account, the higher education construction account, the
highway infrastructure account, the industrial insurance premium refund
account, the judges' retirement account, the judicial retirement administrative
account, the judicial retirement principal account, the local leasehold excise
tax account, the local real estate excise tax account, the local sales and use
tax account, the medical aid account, the mobile home park relocation fund, the
multimodal transportation account, the municipal criminal justice assistance
account, the municipal sales and use tax equalization account, the natural resources
deposit account, the oyster reserve land account, the perpetual surveillance
and maintenance account, the public employees' retirement system plan 1
account, the public employees' retirement system plan 2 account, the public
health supplemental account, the Puyallup tribal settlement account, the
resource management cost account, the site closure account, the special
wildlife account, the state employees' insurance account, the state employees'
insurance reserve account, the state investment board expense account, the
state investment board commingled trust fund accounts, the supplemental pension
account, the teachers' retirement system plan 1 account, the teachers'
retirement system combined plan 2 and plan 3 account, the tobacco prevention
and control account, the tobacco settlement account, the transportation
infrastructure account, the tuition recovery trust fund, the University of
Washington bond retirement fund, the University of Washington building account,
the volunteer fire fighters' and reserve officers' relief and pension principal
fund, the volunteer fire fighters' and reserve officers' administrative fund,
the Washington fruit express account, the Washington judicial retirement system
account, the Washington law enforcement officers' and fire fighters' system
plan 1 retirement account, the Washington law enforcement officers' and fire
fighters' system plan 2 retirement account, the Washington school employees'
retirement system combined plan 2 and 3 account, the Washington state health insurance
pool account, the Washington state patrol retirement account, the Washington
State University building account, the Washington State University bond
retirement fund, the water pollution control revolving fund, and the Western
Washington University capital projects account. Earnings derived from
investing balances of the agricultural permanent fund, the normal school
permanent fund, the permanent common school fund, the scientific permanent
fund, and the state university permanent fund shall be allocated to their
respective beneficiary accounts. All earnings to be distributed under this
subsection (4)(a) shall first be reduced by the allocation to the state
treasurer's service fund pursuant to RCW 43.08.190.

(b) The following
accounts and funds shall receive eighty percent of their proportionate share of
earnings based upon each account's or fund's average daily balance for the
period: The aeronautics account, the aircraft search and rescue account, the
county arterial preservation account, the department of licensing services
account, the essential rail assistance account, the ferry bond retirement fund,
the grade crossing protective fund, the high capacity transportation account,
the highway bond retirement fund, the highway safety account, the motor vehicle
fund, the motorcycle safety education account, the pilotage account, the public
transportation systems account, the Puget Sound capital construction account,
the Puget Sound ferry operations account, the recreational vehicle account, the
rural arterial trust account, the safety and education account, the special
category C account, the state patrol highway account, the transportation
equipment fund, the transportation fund, the transportation improvement account,
the transportation improvement board bond retirement account, and the urban
arterial trust account.

(5) In conformance with
Article II, section 37 of the state Constitution, no treasury accounts or funds
shall be allocated earnings without the specific affirmative directive of this
section.

Sec. 5. RCW 43.84.092 and 2001
2nd sp.s. c 14 s 608, 2001 c 273 s 6, 2001 c 141 s 3, and 2001 c 80 s 5 are
each reenacted and amended to read as follows:

(1) All earnings of
investments of surplus balances in the state treasury shall be deposited to the
treasury income account, which account is hereby established in the state
treasury.

(2) The treasury income
account shall be utilized to pay or receive funds associated with federal
programs as required by the federal cash management improvement act of 1990.
The treasury income account is subject in all respects to chapter 43.88 RCW,
but no appropriation is required for refunds or allocations of interest
earnings required by the cash management improvement act. Refunds of interest
to the federal treasury required under the cash management improvement act fall
under RCW 43.88.180 and shall not require appropriation. The office of
financial management shall determine the amounts due to or from the federal
government pursuant to the cash management improvement act. The office of
financial management may direct transfers of funds between accounts as deemed
necessary to implement the provisions of the cash management improvement act, and
this subsection. Refunds or allocations shall occur prior to the distributions
of earnings set forth in subsection (4) of this section.

(3) Except for the
provisions of RCW 43.84.160, the treasury income account may be utilized for
the payment of purchased banking services on behalf of treasury funds
including, but not limited to, depository, safekeeping, and disbursement
functions for the state treasury and affected state agencies. The treasury
income account is subject in all respects to chapter 43.88 RCW, but no
appropriation is required for payments to financial institutions. Payments
shall occur prior to distribution of earnings set forth in subsection (4) of
this section.

(4) Monthly, the state
treasurer shall distribute the earnings credited to the treasury income
account. The state treasurer shall credit the general fund with all the
earnings credited to the treasury income account except:

(a) The following
accounts and funds shall receive their proportionate share of earnings based
upon each account's and fund's average daily balance for the period: The
capitol building construction account, the Cedar River channel construction and
operation account, the Central Washington University capital projects account,
the charitable, educational, penal and reformatory institutions account, the
common school construction fund, the county criminal justice assistance
account, the county sales and use tax equalization account, the crop damage
management account, the data processing building construction account, the
deferred compensation administrative account, the deferred compensation
principal account, the department of retirement systems expense account, the
drinking water assistance account, the drinking water assistance administrative
account, the drinking water assistance repayment account, the Eastern
Washington University capital projects account, the education construction
fund, the emergency reserve fund, the federal forest revolving account, the
health services account, the public health services account, the health system
capacity account, the personal health services account, the state higher
education construction account, the higher education construction account, the
highway infrastructure account, the industrial insurance premium refund account,
the judges' retirement account, the judicial retirement administrative account,
the judicial retirement principal account, the local leasehold excise tax
account, the local real estate excise tax account, the local sales and use tax
account, the medical aid account, the mobile home park relocation fund, the
multimodal transportation account, the municipal criminal justice assistance
account, the municipal sales and use tax equalization account, the natural
resources deposit account, the oyster reserve land account, the perpetual
surveillance and maintenance account, the public employees' retirement system
plan 1 account, the public employees' retirement system combined plan 2 and
plan 3 account, the public health supplemental account, the Puyallup tribal
settlement account, the resource management cost account, the site closure
account, the special wildlife account, the state employees' insurance account,
the state employees' insurance reserve account, the state investment board
expense account, the state investment board commingled trust fund accounts, the
supplemental pension account, the teachers' retirement system plan 1 account,
the teachers' retirement system combined plan 2 and plan 3 account, the tobacco
prevention and control account, the tobacco settlement account, the
transportation infrastructure account, the tuition recovery trust fund, the
University of Washington bond retirement fund, the University of Washington
building account, the volunteer fire fighters' and reserve officers' relief and
pension principal fund, the volunteer fire fighters' and reserve officers'
administrative fund, the Washington fruit express account, the Washington
judicial retirement system account, the Washington law enforcement officers'
and fire fighters' system plan 1 retirement account, the Washington law
enforcement officers' and fire fighters' system plan 2 retirement account, the
Washington school employees' retirement system combined plan 2 and 3 account,
the Washington state health insurance pool account, the Washington state patrol
retirement account, the Washington State University building account, the
Washington State University bond retirement fund, the water pollution control
revolving fund, and the Western Washington University capital projects account.
Earnings derived from investing balances of the agricultural permanent fund,
the normal school permanent fund, the permanent common school fund, the
scientific permanent fund, and the state university permanent fund shall be
allocated to their respective beneficiary accounts. All earnings to be
distributed under this subsection (4)(a) shall first be reduced by the
allocation to the state treasurer's service fund pursuant to RCW 43.08.190.

(b) The following
accounts and funds shall receive eighty percent of their proportionate share of
earnings based upon each account's or fund's average daily balance for the
period: The aeronautics account, the aircraft search and rescue account, the
county arterial preservation account, the department of licensing services
account, the essential rail assistance account, the ferry bond retirement fund,
the grade crossing protective fund, the high capacity transportation account,
the highway bond retirement fund, the highway safety account, the motor vehicle
fund, the motorcycle safety education account, the pilotage account, the public
transportation systems account, the Puget Sound capital construction account,
the Puget Sound ferry operations account, the recreational vehicle account, the
rural arterial trust account, the safety and education account, the special
category C account, the state patrol highway account, the transportation
equipment fund, the transportation fund, the transportation improvement
account, the transportation improvement board bond retirement account, and the
urban arterial trust account.

(5) In conformance with
Article II, section 37 of the state Constitution, no treasury accounts or funds
shall be allocated earnings without the specific affirmative directive of this
section.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
6. Section 4 of this act
expires March 1, 2002.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
7. Section 5 of this act
takes effect March 1, 2002.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 8. Except for section 5 of this
act, this act is necessary for the immediate preservation of the public peace,
health, or safety, or support of the state government and its existing public
institutions, and takes effect immediately.

---
END ---