BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF
WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1. RCW 46.12.047 and 2001 c
125 s 3 are each amended to read as follows:

The
department shall institute software and systems modifications to enable a
WACIC/NCIC stolen vehicle search of out-of-state vehicles as part of the title
transaction. During the stolen vehicle search, if the information obtained
indicates the vehicle is stolen, that information shall be immediately reported
to the state patrol and the applicant shall not be ((permitted to register))
issued a certificate of ownership for the vehicle. Vehicles for which
the stolen vehicle check is negative shall be ((registered)) issued a
certificate of ownership if the department is satisfied that all other
requirements have been met.

--- END ---