BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF
WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec.
1. A new section is added
to chapter 47.12 RCW to read as follows:

(1) The department may
enter into exchange agreements with local, state, or federal agencies, tribal
governments, or private nonprofit groups incorporated in this state that are
organized for environmental conservation purposes, to convey properties under
the jurisdiction of the department that serve as environmental mitigation
sites, as full or part consideration for the grantee assuming all future
maintenance and operation obligations and costs required to maintain and
operate the environmental mitigation site in perpetuity.

(2) Tribal governments
shall only be eligible to participate in an exchange agreement if they:

(a) Provide the
department with a valid waiver of their tribal sovereign immunity from suit.
The waiver must allow the department to enforce the terms of the exchange
agreement or quitclaim deed in state court; and

(b) Agree that the
property shall not be placed into trust status.

(3) The
conveyances must be by quitclaim deed executed by the secretary of
transportation, and must expressly restrict the use of the property to a
mitigation site consistent with preservation of the functions and values of the
site, and must provide for the automatic reversion to the department if the
property is not used as a mitigation site or is not maintained in a manner that
complies with applicable permits, laws, and regulations pertaining to the
maintenance and operation of the mitigation site.

--- END ---