BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF
WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1. RCW 15.17.230 and 1998 c
154 s 15 are each amended to read as follows:

For the purpose
of this chapter the state shall be divided into not less than ((three)) two
fruit and vegetable inspection districts ((to which the director may assign
a district manager who shall supervise and administer regulatory and inspection
affairs of the districts)). The director, by rule, shall establish the
boundaries of the districts and may adjust the boundaries for purposes of
efficiency and economy.

Sec. 2. RCW 15.17.240 and 1998 c
154 s 16 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) ((The district
managers shall collect the fees provided for under this chapter and deposit
them in the fruit and vegetable district fund in any bank in the district
approved for the deposit of state funds. The fees shall be used to carry out the
provisions of this chapter and no appropriation is required for disbursement
from the fund. District managers shall approve payments from the fruit and
vegetable inspection district funds to the fruit and vegetable inspection trust
account in accordance with RCW 15.17.245. On a monthly basis, each district
manager shall provide to the director a detailed account of the receipts and
disbursements for the preceding month.

(2) Assessments and
other fees approved by the director or authorized by law and collected by the
district managers shall be deposited in the fruit and vegetable inspection
district funds and distributed to the appropriate fund or agency.)) The fruit and vegetable inspection account
is created in the custody of the state treasurer. All fees collected under
this chapter must be deposited into the account. The director may authorize
expenditures from the account solely for the implementation and enforcement of
this chapter and may make other expenditures authorized by statute or session
law and applying specifically to the account. The account is subject to
allotment procedures under chapter 43.88 RCW, but an appropriation is not
required for expenditures.

The director shall
establish and maintain an account within the fruit and vegetable inspection
account for each district established under RCW 15.17.230.

(2) By August 1,
2004, and by August 1st of each even-numbered year thereafter, the director
shall review the balance of each of the district accounts in the fruit and
vegetable inspection account at the end of the previous fiscal year. If the
balance in a district account exceeds the sum of the following: An amount
equal to the total expenditures of the district served by that account for the
last six months of that previous fiscal year; any budgeted capital expenditures
from the account for the current fiscal year; and six hundred thousand dollars,
the director shall temporarily and equally, on a percentage basis, reduce each
of the fees accruing to the district account until such time that the district
account has a balance equal to the amount of the total expenditures from the
account for the last seven months of the previous fiscal year, at which time
the fees shall be returned to the amounts before the temporary reduction. In
making the reductions, the director shall attempt to reduce fees for a
twelve-month period so as to apply the reductions to as many of the persons who
annually pay fees for services provided by the district. The temporary fee
reductions shall be initially provided through the adoption of emergency
rules. The emergency and subsequent rules temporarily reducing the fees are
exempt from the requirements of RCW 34.05.310 and chapter 19.85 RCW. These fees
shall be reinstated through the expiration of the rules temporarily reducing
them and the authority to reinstate them is hereby granted.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
3. (1) Any residual balance
in any fruit and vegetable district fund on the effective date of this act
shall be transferred to the fruit and vegetable inspection account established
in RCW 15.17.240. Any such residual balance in the district fund for district
number 2, as the district is constituted by rule on January 1, 2002, shall be
transferred to the district account for the district containing Yakima county.
Any such residual balance in the district fund for any other district shall be
transferred to the district account for the district not containing Yakima county.
Any residual balance in the fruit and vegetable inspection trust account on the
effective date of this act shall be transferred to the fruit and vegetable
inspection account established in RCW 15.17.240 and shall be equally
distributed among the district accounts.

(2) The director shall
review the residual balance of each of the district funds transferred to the
fruit and vegetable inspection account under subsection (1) of this section.
If such a residual balance in the district fund exceeds an amount equal to the
total of the expenditures of the district served by that fund for the last six
months of fiscal year 2002, the director of agriculture shall temporarily
reduce each of the inspection fees adopted by rule which accrue to the district
account into which the residual balance from that fund was transferred under
this section. The fees shall be temporarily reduced by twelve and one-half
percent for the district served by the district account and shall remain
temporarily reduced until such time as the district account has a balance equal
to the amount of the total expenditures from the district fund, from which the
district account received such a residual balance exceeding the six-month
expenditures, for the seven months ending June 30, 2002. At such time, the
fees charged shall return to the level of the fees adopted by rule.

(3) As used in this
section, "district account" means an account within the fruit and
vegetable inspection account maintained for a district established under RCW
15.17.230.

Sec. 4. RCW 15.17.243 and 2001 c
92 s 1 are each amended to read as follows:

The district manager
for district two as defined in WAC 16‑458‑075 is authorized to
transfer two hundred thousand dollars from the fruit and vegetable district
fund to the plant pest account within the agricultural local fund. The amount
transferred is to be derived from fees collected for state inspections of tree
fruits and is to be used solely for activities related to the control of
Rhagoletis pomonella in district two. The transfer of funds shall occur by
June 1, 1997. On June 30, 2003, any unexpended portion of the two hundred
thousand dollars shall be ((returned)) transferred to the fruit
and vegetable ((district fund)) inspection account and deposited in
the district account for the district that includes Yakima county.

Sec. 5. RCW 43.79A.040 and 2001
c 201 s 4 and 2001 c 184 s 4 are each reenacted and amended to read as follows:

(1) Money in the
treasurer's trust fund may be deposited, invested, and reinvested by the state
treasurer in accordance with RCW 43.84.080 in the same manner and to the same
extent as if the money were in the state treasury.

(2) All income received
from investment of the treasurer's trust fund shall be set aside in an account
in the treasury trust fund to be known as the investment income account.

(3) The investment
income account may be utilized for the payment of purchased banking services on
behalf of treasurer's trust funds including, but not limited to, depository,
safekeeping, and disbursement functions for the state treasurer or affected
state agencies. The investment income account is subject in all respects to
chapter 43.88 RCW, but no appropriation is required for payments to financial
institutions. Payments shall occur prior to distribution of earnings set forth
in subsection (4) of this section.

(4)(a) Monthly, the
state treasurer shall distribute the earnings credited to the investment income
account to the state general fund except under (b) and (c) of this subsection.

(b) The following
accounts and funds shall receive their proportionate share of earnings based
upon each account's or fund's average daily balance for the period: The
college savings program account, the Washington advanced college tuition
payment program account, the agricultural local fund, the American Indian
scholarship endowment fund, the basic health plan self-insurance reserve
account, the Washington international exchange scholarship endowment fund, the
developmental disabilities endowment trust fund, the energy account, the fair
fund, the fruit and vegetable inspection account, the game farm
alternative account, the grain inspection revolving fund, the juvenile
accountability incentive account, the rural rehabilitation account, the stadium
and exhibition center account, the youth athletic facility account, the
self-insurance revolving fund, the sulfur dioxide abatement account, and the
children's trust fund. However, the earnings to be distributed shall first be
reduced by the allocation to the state treasurer's service fund pursuant to RCW
43.08.190.

(c) The following
accounts and funds shall receive eighty percent of their proportionate share of
earnings based upon each account's or fund's average daily balance for the
period: The advanced right of way revolving fund, the advanced environmental
mitigation revolving account, the city and county advance right-of-way
revolving fund, the federal narcotics asset forfeitures account, the high
occupancy vehicle account, the local rail service assistance account, and the
miscellaneous transportation programs account.

(5) In conformance with
Article II, section 37 of the state Constitution, no trust accounts or funds
shall be allocated earnings without the specific affirmative directive of this
section.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
6. The department of
agriculture and the office of financial management shall jointly examine the
administrative support provided by the department to the fruit and vegetable
inspection program conducted in the fruit and vegetable inspection districts
and the funding provided by fruit and vegetable inspection fees, and interest
on any moneys derived from those fees, for the administration of the
department. The examination must include an identification of each position
within the administration funded in whole or in part by funding derived from
those fees and the amount of that funding provided for each position. It must
also include a description of the proximity of the functions performed by the
positions to the delivery of inspection services in the inspection districts.
The department and office shall compare this information to the same type of
information regarding the funding for departmental administration provided by
moneys derived from each of the other unappropriated accounts from which the director
of agriculture may make expenditures. The department and office shall report
their results of the examination to the governor and the legislature by
December 1, 2002.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
7. If fruit and vegetable
inspection districts that existed on January 1, 2002, under RCW 15.17.230 are
consolidated or otherwise altered during 2002, the consolidation or alteration
must not result in a reduction of inspection services or the availability or
quality of those services in any of the districts, but may result in a
consolidation of administrative support for those services.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
8. RCW 15.17.245 (Fruit and vegetable
inspection trust account) and 1998 c 154 s 19, 1987 c 393 s 2, 1986 c 203 s 1,
1969 ex.s. c 76 s 1, & 1961 c 11 s 15.04.100 are each repealed.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 9. This act takes effect
July 1, 2002. However, the director of the department of agriculture and the
state treasurer may take actions before July 1, 2002, to permit the creation of
the fruit and vegetable inspection account and the district accounts described
in RCW 15.17.240 by July 1, 2002.

---
END ---