BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF
WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec.
1. A new section is added
to chapter 26.21 RCW under the subchapter heading "Article 4" to read
as follows:

(1) A payment made
under a support order that has been properly addressed and deposited postpaid
in the United States mail is deemed to have been received by a support
enforcement agency or tribunal of this state on the date of the mailing. It
will be presumed that the date shown by the post office cancellation mark on
the envelope is the date of mailing.

(2) A
person who causes a cancellation mark to reflect a date earlier than the actual
date of mailing is guilty of a misdemeanor punishable under RCW 9.92.030.

--- END ---