BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF
WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec.
1. A new section is added
to chapter 5.64 RCW to read as follows:

The department of
transportation is encouraged to take reasonable precautions to aid drivers in
safely negotiating icy state highways, including providing signs warning of icy
conditions.

(1) When, after an
accident on a state highway potentially caused by icy conditions, the
department takes measures which, if taken previously, would have made the event
less likely to occur, evidence of the subsequent measures is not admissible to
prove negligence or culpable conduct in connection with the event.

(2) Evidence of
measures taken by the department of transportation to aid drivers in safely
negotiating icy state highways in one location is not admissible to prove
negligence or culpable conduct in connection with an accident occurring at
another location.

(3) This section does
not require the exclusion of evidence of subsequent measures when offered for
another purpose, such as proving ownership, control, or feasibility of
precautionary measures, if controverted, or impeachment.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 2. This act is necessary for
the immediate preservation of the public peace, health, or safety, or support
of the state government and its existing public institutions, and takes effect
immediately.

---
END ---