BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF
WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec.
1. A new section is added
to chapter 43.30 RCW to read as follows:

(1) The legislature
recognizes that the department of natural resources makes recreation sites
available to the public and that many of these sites are primitive in nature.
The legislature finds that the department lacks the necessary staff and money to
maintain these recreation sites despite their primitive nature, and that a
number of these recreation sites are at risk of closing. The legislature also
finds that the state adopt-a-highway program under the department of
transportation has been successful in attracting volunteers to help keep the
roadsides clean. The legislature finds that by providing expanded
opportunities for participation by volunteers at recreation sites operated by
the department of natural resources, the state may save money and be able to
keep some recreation sites open that would otherwise close, and there may be
expanded community service opportunities for youth groups, other civic
organizations, and businesses.

(2) If a recreation
site is determined by the department as appropriate to keep open but the site
is being considered for permanent closure due to insufficient funds, before the
department may close the recreation site the department must involve the public
and interested stakeholders in seeking alternatives to closure that may involve
partnerships with volunteers, businesses, other governmental agencies, and
organizations.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
2. A new section is added
to chapter 43.30 RCW to read as follows:

(1) The department
shall seek partnerships with volunteer groups and businesses to expand its
volunteer program to facilitate the goals of this section and section 1 of this
act. The department may solicit funding for a recreation site volunteer
program and allow private entities to undertake all or a portion of financing
for the initiatives. The department shall develop guidelines regarding labor,
cash, and in-kind contributions to be performed by volunteers.

(2) The department of
natural resources may enter into agreements with other state and federal
agencies, units of local government, nonprofit organizations, and businesses to
perform necessary maintenance and repair of recreation sites, and to coordinate
volunteers working at these recreation sites.

(3) The department
shall develop a standardized application form, registration form, and
contractual agreement for all participating groups. The department shall
develop guidelines for: The minimum age of participants, the minimum ratio of
adult supervisors for different size groups of minors, any requisite safety
training or safety equipment, the maintaining of records of any accidents or
injuries that occur, and anything else deemed necessary to implement this
program. The department shall require parental consent for participation of
all minors.

(4) A volunteer group
or business interested in participating in a recreation site volunteer program
must submit a proposal to the department. The department shall review the
proposal for consistency with its policies and guidelines. The department may
accept, reject, or propose a modification to the proposed application.

(5) A volunteer
performing any authorized or assigned work at a recreation site is considered a
state employee for the purpose of receiving medical aid benefits under chapter
51.36 RCW, and the department shall pay any and all premiums or assessments
under RCW 51.12.035 to secure these benefits. A participating business must
pay all employer premiums and assessments required under chapter 51.36 RCW to
secure medical aid for all employees or agents participating in the program.

(6) Nothing in this
section or section 1 of this act creates any right of appeal under chapter
34.05 RCW regarding the closure of a recreation site.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 3. If specific funding for
the purposes of this act, referencing this act by bill or chapter number, is
not provided by June 30, 2002, in the omnibus appropriations act, this act is
null and void.

---
END ---