BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF
WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1. RCW 82.60.020 and 1999
sp.s. c 9 s 2 are each amended to read as follows:

Unless the context
clearly requires otherwise, the definitions in this section apply throughout
this chapter.

(1)
"Applicant" means a person applying for a tax deferral under this
chapter.

(2)
"Department" means the department of revenue.

(3) "Eligible
area" means a: (a) Rural county ((with fewer than one hundred
persons per square mile as determined annually by the office of financial
management and published by the department of revenue effective for the period
July 1st through June 30th)); or (b) a county that has experienced a
loss of more than five hundred federal civilian jobs over the most recent
four-year period for which quarterly data is available and federal civilian
employment in the county exceeds fifteen percent of the total employment
covered by the Washington employment security act and federal employment
covered by Title 5, U.S.C. 85, in that county, as determined on a biennial
basis by the employment security department.

(4)(a) "Eligible
investment project" means an investment project in an eligible area as
defined in subsection (3) of this section.

(b) The lessor/owner of
a qualified building is not eligible for a deferral unless the underlying
ownership of the buildings, machinery, and equipment vests exclusively in the
same person, or unless the lessor by written contract agrees to pass the
economic benefit of the deferral to the lessee in the form of reduced rent
payments.

(c) "Eligible
investment project" does not include any portion of an investment project
undertaken by a light and power business as defined in RCW 82.16.010(5), other
than that portion of a cogeneration project that is used to generate power for
consumption within the manufacturing site of which the cogeneration project is
an integral part, or investment projects which have already received deferrals
under this chapter.

(5) "Investment
project" means an investment in qualified buildings or qualified machinery
and equipment, including labor and services rendered in the planning,
installation, and construction of the project.

(6)
"Manufacturing" means the same as defined in RCW 82.04.120.
"Manufacturing" also includes computer programming, the production of
computer software, and other computer-related services, and the activities
performed by research and development laboratories and commercial testing
laboratories.

(7) "Person"
has the meaning given in RCW 82.04.030.

(8) "Qualified
buildings" means construction of new structures, and expansion or
renovation of existing structures for the purpose of increasing floor space or
production capacity used for manufacturing and research and development
activities, including plant offices and warehouses or other facilities for the
storage of raw material or finished goods if such facilities are an essential
or an integral part of a factory, mill, plant, or laboratory used for
manufacturing or research and development. If a building is used partly for
manufacturing or research and development and partly for other purposes, the
applicable tax deferral shall be determined by apportionment of the costs of
construction under rules adopted by the department.

(9) "Qualified
machinery and equipment" means all new industrial and research fixtures,
equipment, and support facilities that are an integral and necessary part of a
manufacturing or research and development operation. "Qualified machinery
and equipment" includes: Computers; software; data processing equipment;
laboratory equipment; manufacturing components such as belts, pulleys, shafts,
and moving parts; molds, tools, and dies; operating structures; and all
equipment used to control or operate the machinery.

(10)
"Recipient" means a person receiving a tax deferral under this
chapter.

(11) "Research and
development" means the development, refinement, testing, marketing, and
commercialization of a product, service, or process before commercial sales
have begun. As used in this subsection, "commercial sales" excludes
sales of prototypes or sales for market testing if the total gross receipts
from such sales of the product, service, or process do not exceed one million
dollars.

(12)
"Rural county" means a county with fewer than one hundred persons per
square mile as determined annually by the office of financial management and
published by the department of revenue effective for the period July 1st
through June 30th.

--- END ---