BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF
WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec.
1. (1) The legislature finds
that there are significant numbers of persons in jail in Washington state who
suffer from mental illness or have co-occurring mental illness and chemical
dependency. Despite these significant numbers, only a very small percentage of
jail inmates with mental health needs have access to treatment services while
in jail. Without access to needed treatment, mentally ill offenders in jail
present a risk to their own safety and well-being, as well as a risk to the
safety of others.

(2) The legislature
further finds that demonstration project models based on a partnership between
state and local government have the potential to identify innovative and
cost-effective approaches to improve services to, and management of, mentally
ill offenders. These new approaches can reduce the risk of mentally ill individuals
cycling repeatedly through the criminal justice, mental health involuntary
commitment, hospital emergency room, and mental health and substance abuse
treatment systems. Innovative approaches may require some flexibility on the
part of the department of social and health services in its administration of
mental health, substance abuse, and medical assistance programs.

(3) The legislature
intends to further state and local cooperative efforts by initiating an
implementation planning process.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
2. (1) The secretary of the
department of social and health services shall designate two counties, one in
western Washington with a population of at least one hundred eighty thousand,
but not more than two hundred twenty thousand, and one in eastern Washington,
with a population of at least fifty thousand, but not more than two hundred
fifty thousand, for demonstration projects to improve the treatment and
management of and reduce criminal activity of mentally ill offenders.

(2) The department of
social and health services shall establish a mentally ill offender task force
whose membership includes:

(a) The assistant
secretary of the department of social and health services medical assistance
administration, or his or her designee;

(b) The assistant
secretary of the department of social and health services juvenile
rehabilitation administration, or his or her designee;

(c) The director of the
department of social and health services mental health division, or his or her
designee;

(d) The director of the
department of social and health services division of alcohol and substance
abuse, or his or her designee;

(e) The secretary of
the department of corrections, or his or her designee; and

(f) From each of the
counties designated under subsection (1) of this section:

(i) The director of the
regional support network whose service area includes that county, or his or her
designee;

(ii) The county
chemical dependency coordinator;

(iii) The county jail
administrator, or his or her designee;

(iv) The county
sheriff, or his or her designee;

(v) A judge of the
superior, district, or municipal court of the county;

(vi) The county
prosecutor, or his or her designee;

(vii) A member of the
criminal defense bar;

(viii) The director of
probation services; and

(ix) An individual
representing persons with mental illness.

(3) The task force
shall develop a plan to implement section 3 of this act. The implementation
plan must be submitted to appropriate committees of the legislature and the
governor by December 15, 2002, and must include any recommendations for changes
to state statutes or regulations necessary to meet the goals of, and fully
implement, regional mentally ill offender demonstration projects.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
3. (1) The mentally ill
offender task force shall design demonstration projects for the two counties
designated in section 2 of this act that can serve as models for appropriate
treatment and management of mentally ill, and mentally ill and chemically
dependent, offenders through a partnership between the state and counties.

(2) The demonstration
projects must have the following goals and include the capacity to measure and
evaluate the extent to which these goals are met:

(a) Identification and
tracking of mentally ill offenders across service systems;

(b) Diversion of
nonviolent mentally ill individuals, or mentally ill and chemically dependent
individuals, from the criminal justice system into appropriate treatment
programs;

(c) In coordination
with RCW 10.77.090, access to evaluation and treatment for mentally ill, or
mentally ill and chemically dependent, offenders, who have been charged with,
or convicted of, a crime and are awaiting trial or sentencing or are serving a
sentence in a city, county, or regional jail, including adequate predischarge
planning to ensure access to appropriate treatment and medication upon release
from jail;

(d) Reduction of
recidivism rates of mentally ill, and mentally ill and chemically dependent,
offenders; and

(e) Linkage to
appropriate services for mentally ill offenders, such as housing,
transportation, and vocational services.

(3) Issues to be
addressed by the task force and included in the implementation plan include,
but are not limited to:

(a) Mechanisms to share
information among mental health and substance abuse treatment providers and the
criminal justice system in a manner that adequately protects individuals'
privacy, yet facilitates coordinated treatment and management;

(b) Access to medical
assistance benefits as a part of predischarge planning for offenders who would
be eligible under existing medical assistance rules upon release from jail;

(c) Identification of
opportunities to better coordinate and maximize the value of existing mental
health, substance abuse, and criminal justice resources to better serve and
manage mentally ill, and mentally ill and chemically dependent, offenders; and

(d) Identification of
public and private resources to fund the demonstration projects.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 4. The sum of fifty thousand
dollars, or as much thereof as may be necessary, is appropriated for the
biennium ending June 30, 2003, from the general fund‑-state to the
department of social and health services for the purposes of this act.

---
END ---