BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF
WASHINGTON:

PART I

ESTABLISHMENT OF TRANSPORTATION

PERFORMANCE MEASURES

NEW SECTION. Sec.
101. LEGISLATIVE INTENT. It is the intent of the
legislature to establish policy goals for the operation, performance of, and
investment in, the state's transportation system. The policy goals shall
consist of, but not be limited to, the following benchmark categories, adopted by
the state's Blue Ribbon Commission on Transportation on November 30, 2000. In
addition to improving safety, public investments in transportation shall
support achievement of these and other priority goals:

No interstate highways,
state routes, and local arterials shall be in poor condition; no bridges shall
be structurally deficient, and safety retrofits shall be performed on those
state bridges at the highest seismic risk levels; traffic congestion on urban
state highways shall be significantly reduced and be no worse than the national
mean; delay per driver shall be significantly reduced and no worse than the
national mean; per capita vehicle miles traveled shall be maintained at 2000
levels; the nonauto share of commuter trips shall be increased in urban areas;
administrative costs as a percentage of transportation spending shall achieve
the most efficient quartile nationally; and the state's public transit agencies
shall achieve the median cost per vehicle revenue hour of peer transit
agencies, adjusting for the regional cost-of-living.

These policy goals
shall be the basis for establishment of detailed and measurable performance
benchmarks.

It is the intent of the
legislature that the transportation commission establish performance measures
to ensure transportation system performance at local, regional, and state
government levels, and the transportation commission should work with
appropriate government entities to accomplish this.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
102. Section 101 of this act
takes effect July 1, 2002.

PART
II

ALTERNATIVE DELIVERY PROCEDURES FOR
CONSTRUCTION SERVICES

NEW SECTION. Sec.
201. The legislature finds
that there is a pressing need for additional transportation projects to meet
the mobility needs of Washington citizens. With major new investments approved
to meet these pressing needs, additional work force assistance is necessary to
ensure and enhance project delivery timelines. Recruiting and retaining a high
quality work force, and implementing new and innovative procedures for
delivering these transportation projects is required to accomplish them on a
timely basis that best serves the public. It is the intent of sections 202 and
203 of this act that no state employees will lose their employment as a result
of implementing new and innovative project delivery procedures.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
202. A new section is added
to chapter 47.28 RCW to read as follows:

(1) The department of
transportation shall work with representatives of transportation labor groups
to develop a financial incentive program to aid in retention and recruitment of
employee classifications where problems exist and program delivery is negatively
affected. The department's financial incentive program must be reviewed and
approved by the legislature before it can be implemented. Upon receiving
approval from the legislature, the department of personnel shall implement, as
required, specific aspects of the financial incentive package, as developed by
the department of transportation.

(2) Notwithstanding
chapter 41.06 RCW, the department of transportation may acquire consultant
services from qualified private firms in order to deliver the transportation
construction program to the public. Consultant services may be acquired solely
for augmenting the department's work force capacity and only when the
department's transportation construction program cannot be delivered through
its existing or readily available work force. The department of transportation
shall work with representatives of transportation labor groups to develop and
implement a program identifying those projects requiring contract services
while establishing a program as defined in subsection (1) of this section to
provide the classified personnel necessary to deliver future construction
programs. The procedures for acquiring construction engineering services from
private firms may not be used to displace existing state employees nor diminish
the number of existing classified positions in the present construction
program. The acquisition procedures must be in accordance with chapter 39.80
RCW.

(3) Starting in
December 2003, and biennially thereafter, the secretary shall report to the
transportation committees of the legislature on the use of construction
engineering services from private firms authorized under this section. The
information provided to the committees must include an assessment of the
benefits and costs associated with using engineering services, or other
services, from private firms, and a comparison of public versus private sector
costs. The secretary is authorized to act on these findings to ensure the most
cost-effective means of service delivery.

Sec. 203. RCW 41.06.380 and 1979
ex.s. c 46 s 2 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) Nothing
contained in this chapter shall prohibit any department, as defined in RCW
41.06.020, from purchasing services by contract with individuals or business
entities if such services were regularly purchased by valid contract by such
department prior to April 23, 1979: PROVIDED, That no such contract may be
executed or renewed if it would have the effect of terminating classified
employees or classified employee positions existing at the time of the
execution or renewal of the contract.

(2) Nothing
contained in this chapter prohibits the department of transportation from
purchasing construction engineering services by contract from qualified private
businesses as specified in section 202(2) of this act.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
204. Sections 201 through 203
of this act and RCW 41.06.380(2) are null and void if new transportation
revenues do not become law by January 1, 2003. Sections 201 through 203 of
this act and RCW 41.06.380(2) are effective only for the period consistent with
the new transportation revenues, after which time these provisions will expire.

PART
III

APPRENTICESHIP AND ADJUSTMENTS TO PREVAILING
WAGE PROVISIONS

NEW SECTION. Sec.
301. (1) The legislature finds
that a skilled technical work force is necessary for maintaining, preserving,
and improving Washington's transportation system. The Blue Ribbon Commission
on Transportation found that state and local transportation agencies are
showing signs of a work force that is insufficiently skilled to operate the
transportation system at its highest level. Sections 301 through 308 of this
act are intended to explore methods for fostering a stronger industry in
transportation planning and engineering.

(2) It is the intent of
the legislature that the state prevailing wage process operate efficiently,
that the process allow contractors and workers to be paid promptly, and that
new technologies and innovative outreach methods be used to enhance wage
surveys in order to better reflect current wages in counties across the state.

(3) The legislature
finds that in order to enhance the prevailing wage process it is appropriate
for all intent and affidavit fees paid by contractors be dedicated to the sole
purpose of administering the state prevailing wage program.

(4) To accomplish the
intent of this section and in order to enhance the response of businesses and
labor representatives to the prevailing wage survey process, the department
shall undertake the following activities:

(a) Establish a goal of
conducting surveys for each trade every three years;

(b) Actively promote
increased response rates from all survey recipients in every county both urban
and rural. The department shall provide public education and technical
assistance to businesses, labor representatives, and public agencies in order
to promote a better understanding of prevailing wage laws and increased
participation in the prevailing wage survey process;

(c) Actively work with
businesses, labor representatives, public agencies, and others to ensure the
integrity of information used in the development of prevailing wage rates, and
ensure uniform compliance with requirements of sections 301 through 308 of this
act;

(d) Maintain a timely
processing of intents and affidavits, with a target processing time no greater
than seven working days from receipt of completed forms;

(e) Develop and
implement electronic processing of intents and affidavits and promote the
efficient and effective use of technology to improve the services provided by
the prevailing wage program.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
302. A new section is added
to chapter 49.04 RCW to read as follows:

The apprenticeship
council shall work with the department of transportation, local transportation
jurisdictions, local and statewide joint apprenticeships, other apprenticeship
programs, representatives of labor and business organizations with interest and
expertise in the transportation work force, and representatives of the state's
universities and community and vocational colleges to establish technical
apprenticeship opportunities specific to the needs of transportation. The
council shall issue a report of findings and recommendations to the
transportation committees of the legislature by December 1, 2002. The report
must include, but not be limited to, findings and recommendations regarding the
establishment of transportation technical training programs within the
community and vocational college system and in the state universities.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
303. A new section is added
to chapter 47.01 RCW to read as follows:

The department of
transportation shall work with local transportation jurisdictions and
representatives of transportation labor groups to establish a human resources
skills bank of transportation professionals. The skills bank must be designed
to allow all transportation authorities to draw from it when needed. The
department shall issue a report of findings and recommendations to the
transportation committees of the legislature by December 1, 2002. The report
must include, but not be limited to, identification of any statutory or
administrative rule changes necessary to create the skills bank and allow it to
function in the manner described.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
304. A new section is added
to chapter 47.06 RCW to read as follows:

The state-interest
component of the statewide multimodal transportation plan must include a plan
for enhancing the skills of the existing technical transportation work force.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
305. The department of labor
and industries, in cooperation with the department of transportation, shall
conduct an assessment of the current practices, including survey techniques,
used in setting prevailing wages for those trades related to transportation
facilities and transportation project delivery. The assessment must include an
analysis of regional variations. A final report must be submitted to the
governor and the transportation committees of the senate and house of
representatives by December 1, 2002.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
306. A new section is added
to chapter 39.12 RCW to read as follows:

(1) In establishing the
prevailing rate of wage under RCW 39.12.010, 39.12.015, and 39.12.020, all data
collected by the department may be used only in the county for which the work
was performed.

(2) This section only
applies to prevailing wage surveys initiated on or after August 1, 2002.

Sec. 307. RCW 39.12.070 and 1993 c
404 s 1 are each amended to read as follows:

The department of labor
and industries may charge fees to awarding agencies on public works for the
approval of statements of intent to pay prevailing wages and the certification
of affidavits of wages paid. The department may also charge fees to persons or
organizations requesting the arbitration of disputes under RCW 39.12.060. The
amount of the fees shall be established by rules adopted by the department
under the procedures in the administrative procedure act, chapter 34.05 RCW.
The fees shall apply to all approvals, certifications, and arbitration requests
made after the effective date of the rules. All fees shall be deposited in the
public works administration account. ((On the fifteenth day of the first
month of each quarterly period, an amount equalling thirty percent of the
revenues received into the public works administration account shall be transferred
into the general fund.)) The department may refuse to arbitrate for
contractors, subcontractors, persons, or organizations which have not paid the
proper fees. The department may, if necessary, request the attorney general to
take legal action to collect delinquent fees.

The department shall
set the fees permitted by this section at a level that generates revenue that
is as near as practicable to the amount of the appropriation to administer this
chapter, including, but not limited to, the performance of adequate wage
surveys, and to investigate and enforce all alleged violations of this chapter,
including, but not limited to, incorrect statements of intent to pay prevailing
wage, incorrect certificates of affidavits of wages paid, and wage claims, as
provided for in this chapter and chapters 49.48 and 49.52 RCW. However, the
fees charged for the approval of statements of intent to pay prevailing wages
and the certification of affidavits of wages paid shall be no greater than
twenty-five dollars.

Sec. 308. RCW 39.12.080 and 2001 c
219 s 3 are each amended to read as follows:

The public works
administration account is created in the state treasury. The department of
labor and industries shall deposit in the account all moneys received from fees
or civil penalties collected under RCW 39.12.050, 39.12.065, and 39.12.070.
Appropriations from the account((, not including moneys transferred to the
general fund pursuant to RCW 39.12.070,)) may be made only for the purposes
of administration of this chapter, including, but not limited to, the
performance of adequate wage surveys, and for the investigation and enforcement
of all alleged violations of this chapter as provided for in this chapter and
chapters 49.48 and 49.52 RCW.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
309. Sections 301 through 308
and 310 of this act are null and void if new transportation revenues do not
become law by January 1, 2003.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
310. The sum of nine hundred
fifty thousand dollars, or as much thereof as may be necessary, is appropriated
from the public works administration account to the department of labor and
industries for the biennium ending June 30, 2003, to carry out the purposes of
sections 306 through 308 of this act.

PART
IV

TRANSPORTATION PLANNING AND
EFFICIENCY

Sec. 401. RCW 47.05.010 and 1993 c
490 s 1 are each amended to read as follows:

The legislature finds
that solutions to state highway deficiencies have become increasingly complex
and diverse and that anticipated transportation revenues will fall
substantially short of the amount required to satisfy all transportation
needs. Difficult investment trade-offs will be required.

It is the intent of the
legislature that investment of state transportation funds to address
deficiencies on the state highway system be based on a policy of priority
programming having as its basis the rational selection of projects and services
according to factual need and an evaluation of life cycle costs and benefits ((and
which)) that are systematically scheduled to carry out defined
objectives within available revenue. The state must develop analytic tools
to use a common methodology to measure benefits and costs for all modes.

The priority
programming system ((shall)) must ensure preservation of the
existing state highway system, relieve congestion, provide mobility for
people and goods, support the state's economy, and promote environmental
protection and energy conservation.

The priority
programming system ((shall)) must implement the state-owned
highway component of the statewide ((multimodal)) transportation plan,
consistent with local and regional transportation plans, by targeting state
transportation investment to appropriate multimodal solutions ((which)) that
address identified state highway system deficiencies.

The priority
programming system for improvements ((shall)) must incorporate a
broad range of solutions that are identified in the statewide ((multimodal))
transportation plan as appropriate to address state highway system deficiencies,
including but not limited to highway expansion, efficiency improvements,
nonmotorized transportation facilities, high occupancy vehicle facilities,
transit facilities and services, rail facilities and services, and
transportation demand management programs.

Sec. 402. RCW 47.05.030 and 1998 c
171 s 6 are each amended to read as follows:

The transportation
commission shall adopt a comprehensive six-year investment program specifying
program objectives and performance measures for the preservation and
improvement programs defined in this section. In the specification of
investment program objectives and performance measures, the transportation
commission, in consultation with the Washington state department of
transportation, shall define and adopt standards for effective programming and
prioritization practices including a needs analysis process. The ((needs))
analysis process ((shall)) must ensure the identification of
problems and deficiencies, the evaluation of alternative solutions and
trade-offs, and estimations of the costs and benefits of prospective projects.
The investment program ((shall)) must be revised biennially,
effective on July 1st of odd-numbered years. The investment program ((shall))
must be based upon the needs identified in the state-owned highway
component of the statewide ((multimodal)) transportation plan as defined
in RCW 47.01.071(3).

(1) The preservation
program ((shall)) consists of those investments necessary to
preserve the existing state highway system and to restore existing safety
features, giving consideration to lowest life cycle costing. The preservation
program must require use of the most cost-effective pavement surfaces,
considering:

(a) Life-cycle cost
analysis;

(b) Traffic volume;

(c) Subgrade soil
conditions;

(d) Environmental
and weather conditions;

(e) Materials
available; and

(f) Construction
factors.

The comprehensive
six-year investment program for preservation ((shall)) must
identify projects for two years and an investment plan for the remaining four
years.

(2) The improvement
program ((shall)) consists of investments needed to address
identified deficiencies on the state highway system to increase mobility,
address congestion, and improve ((mobility,)) safety, support for
the economy, and protection of the environment. The six-year investment
program for improvements ((shall)) must identify projects for two
years and major deficiencies proposed to be addressed in the six-year period
giving consideration to relative benefits and life cycle costing. The
transportation commission shall give higher priority for correcting identified deficiencies
on those facilities classified as facilities of statewide significance as
defined in RCW 47.06.140. Project prioritization must be based primarily
upon cost-benefit analysis, where appropriate.

The
transportation commission shall approve and present the comprehensive six-year
investment program to the legislature in support of the biennial budget request
under RCW 44.40.070 and 44.40.080.

Sec. 403. RCW 47.05.035 and 1993 c
490 s 4 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) The department
and the commission shall use the transportation demand modeling tools developed
under subsection (2) of this section to evaluate investments based on the best
mode or improvement, or mix of modes and improvements, to meet current and
future long-term demand within a corridor or system for the lowest cost. The
end result of these demand modeling tools is to provide a cost-benefit analysis
by which the department and the commission can determine the relative mobility
improvement and congestion relief each mode or improvement under consideration
will provide and the relative investment each mode or improvement under
consideration will need to achieve that relief.

(2) The department
will participate in the refinement, enhancement, and application of existing
transportation demand modeling tools to be used to evaluate investments. This
participation and use of transportation demand modeling tools will be phased
in.

(3) In
developing program objectives and performance measures, the transportation
commission shall evaluate investment trade-offs between the preservation and
improvement programs. In making these investment trade-offs, the commission
shall evaluate, using cost-benefit techniques, roadway and bridge maintenance
activities as compared to roadway and bridge preservation program activities
and adjust those programs accordingly.

(4) The
commission shall allocate the estimated revenue between preservation and improvement
programs giving primary consideration to the following factors:

(((1))) (a)
The relative needs in each of the programs and the system performance levels
that can be achieved by meeting these needs;

(((2))) (b)
The need to provide adequate funding for preservation to protect the state's
investment in its existing highway system;

(((3))) (c)
The continuity of future transportation development with those improvements
previously programmed; and

(((4)))
(d) The availability of dedicated funds for a specific type of work.

Sec. 404. RCW 47.06.130 and 1993 c
446 s 13 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) The
department may carry out special transportation planning studies to resolve specific
issues with the development of the state transportation system or other
statewide transportation issues.

(2) The department
shall conduct multimodal corridor analyses on major congested corridors where
needed improvements are likely to cost in excess of one hundred million
dollars. Analysis will include the cost-effectiveness of all feasible
strategies in addressing congestion or improving mobility within the corridor,
and must recommend the most effective strategy or mix of strategies to address identified
deficiencies. A long-term view of corridors must be employed to determine
whether an existing corridor should be expanded, a city or county road should
become a state route, and whether a new corridor is needed to alleviate
congestion and enhance mobility based on travel demand. To the extent
practicable, full costs of all strategies must be reflected in the analysis.
At a minimum, this analysis must include:

(a) The current and
projected future demand for total person trips on that corridor;

(b) The impact of
making no improvements to that corridor;

(c) The daily cost
per added person served for each mode or improvement proposed to meet demand;

(d) The cost per
hour of travel time saved per day for each mode or improvement proposed to meet
demand; and

(e) How much of the
current and anticipated future demand will be met and left unmet for each mode
or improvement proposed to meet demand.

The end result of
this analysis will be to provide a cost-benefit analysis by which policymakers
can determine the most cost-effective improvement or mode, or mix of
improvements and modes, for increasing mobility and reducing congestion.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
405. The legislature intends
that funding for transportation mobility improvements be allocated to the worst
traffic chokepoints in the state. Furthermore, the legislature intends to fund
projects that provide systemic relief throughout a transportation corridor,
rather than spot improvements that fail to improve overall mobility within a
corridor.

Sec. 406. RCW 47.05.051 and 1998 c
175 s 12 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) The
comprehensive six-year investment program shall be based upon the needs
identified in the state-owned highway component of the statewide multimodal
transportation plan as defined in RCW 47.01.071(3) and priority selection
systems that incorporate the following criteria:

(((1))) (a)
Priority programming for the preservation program shall take into account the
following, not necessarily in order of importance:

(((a))) (i)
Extending the service life of the existing highway system, including using
the most cost-effective pavement surfaces, considering:

(A) Life-cycle cost
analysis;

(B) Traffic volume;

(C) Subgrade soil
conditions;

(D) Environmental
and weather conditions;

(E) Materials
available; and

(F) Construction
factors;

(((b))) (ii)
Ensuring the structural ability to carry loads imposed upon highways and
bridges; and

(((c))) (iii)
Minimizing life cycle costs. The transportation commission in carrying out the
provisions of this section may delegate to the department of transportation the
authority to select preservation projects to be included in the six-year
program.

(((2))) (b)
Priority programming for the improvement program ((shall take into account))
must be based primarily upon the following:

(((a))) (i)
Traffic congestion, delay, and accidents;

(ii) Location within
a heavily traveled transportation corridor;

(iii) Synchronization
with other potential transportation projects, including transit and multimodal
projects, within the heavily traveled corridor; and

(iv) Use of
benefit/cost analysis wherever feasible to determine the value of the proposed
project.

(c) Priority programming
for the improvement program may also take into account:

(i) Support for
the state's economy, including job creation and job preservation;

(((b))) (ii)
The cost-effective movement of people and goods;

(((c))) (iii)
Accident and accident risk reduction;

(((d))) (iv)
Protection of the state's natural environment;

(((e))) (v)
Continuity and systematic development of the highway transportation network;

(((f))) (vi)
Consistency with local comprehensive plans developed under chapter 36.70A RCW;

(((g))) (vii)
Consistency with regional transportation plans developed under chapter 47.80
RCW;

(((h))) (viii)
Public views concerning proposed improvements;

(((i))) (ix)
The conservation of energy resources;

(((j))) (x)
Feasibility of financing the full proposed improvement;

(((k))) (xi)
Commitments established in previous legislative sessions;

(((l))) (xii)
Relative costs and benefits of candidate programs((;)).

(((m))) (d)
Major projects addressing capacity deficiencies which prioritize allowing for
preliminary engineering shall be reprioritized during the succeeding biennium,
based upon updated project data. Reprioritized projects may be delayed or
canceled by the transportation commission if higher priority projects are
awaiting funding((; and)).

(((n))) (e)
Major project approvals which significantly increase a project's scope or cost
from original prioritization estimates shall include a review of the project's
estimated revised priority rank and the level of funding provided. Projects
may be delayed or canceled by the transportation commission if higher priority
projects are awaiting funding.

(((3))) (2)
The commission may depart from the priority programming established under
subsection((s)) (1) ((and (2))) of this section: (a) To the
extent that otherwise funds cannot be utilized feasibly within the program; (b)
as may be required by a court judgment, legally binding agreement, or state and
federal laws and regulations; (c) as may be required to coordinate with
federal, local, or other state agency construction projects; (d) to take
advantage of some substantial financial benefit that may be available; (e) for
continuity of route development; or (f) because of changed financial or
physical conditions of an unforeseen or emergent nature. The commission or
secretary of transportation shall maintain in its files information sufficient
to show the extent to which the commission has departed from the established
priority.

(((4))) (3)
The commission shall identify those projects that yield freight mobility
benefits or that alleviate the impacts of freight mobility upon affected
communities.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
407. The department of
transportation shall report the results of its priority programming under RCW
47.05.051 to the transportation committees of the senate and house of
representatives by December 1, 2003, and December 1, 2005.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
408. The legislature finds
that roads, streets, bridges, and highways in the state represent public assets
worth over one hundred billion dollars. These investments require regular
maintenance and preservation, or rehabilitation, to provide cost-effective
transportation services. Many of these facilities are in poor condition.
Given the magnitude of public investment and the importance of safe, reliable
roadways to the motoring public, the legislature intends to create stronger
accountability to ensure that cost-effective maintenance and preservation is
provided for these transportation facilities.

Sec. 409. RCW 35.84.060 and 1969
ex.s. c 281 s 26 are each amended to read as follows:

Every municipal
corporation which owns or operates an urban public transportation system as
defined in RCW 47.04.082 within its corporate limits, may acquire, construct,
extend, own, or operate such urban public transportation system to any
point or points not to exceed fifteen miles outside of its corporate limits:
PROVIDED, That no municipal corporation shall extend its urban public
transportation system beyond its corporate limits to operate in any territory
already served by a privately operated auto transportation company holding a
certificate of public convenience and necessity from the utilities and
transportation commission.

As a condition of
receiving state funding, the municipal corporation shall submit a maintenance
management plan for certification by the transportation commission or its
successor entity. The plan must inventory all transportation system assets
within the direction and control of the municipality, and provide a
preservation plan based on lowest life cycle cost methodologies.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
410. A new section is added
to chapter 36.56 RCW to read as follows:

As a condition of
receiving state funding, a county that has assumed the transportation functions
of a metropolitan municipal corporation shall submit a maintenance and
preservation management plan for certification by the transportation commission
or its successor entity. The plan must inventory all transportation system
assets within the direction and control of the county, and provide a
preservation plan based on lowest life cycle cost methodologies.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
411. A new section is added
to chapter 36.57A RCW to read as follows:

As a condition of
receiving state funding, a public transportation benefit area authority shall
submit a maintenance and preservation management plan for certification by the
transportation commission or its successor entity. The plan must inventory all
transportation system assets within the direction and control of the authority,
and provide a preservation plan based on lowest life cycle cost methodologies.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
412. A new section is added
to chapter 46.68 RCW to read as follows:

During the 2003-2005
biennium, cities and towns shall provide to the transportation commission, or
its successor entity, preservation rating information on at least seventy
percent of the total city and town arterial network. Thereafter, the
preservation rating information requirement shall increase in five percent
increments in subsequent biennia. The rating system used by cities and towns
must be based upon the Washington state pavement rating method or an equivalent
standard approved by the transportation commission or its successor entity.

Sec. 413. RCW 47.06.050 and 1993 c
446 s 5 are each amended to read as follows:

The state-owned
facilities component of the statewide transportation plan shall consist of:

(1) The state highway
system plan, which identifies program and financing needs and recommends
specific and financially realistic improvements to preserve the structural
integrity of the state highway system, ensure acceptable operating conditions,
and provide for enhanced access to scenic, recreational, and cultural
resources. The state highway system plan shall contain the following elements:

(a) A system
preservation element, which shall establish structural preservation objectives
for the state highway system including bridges, identify current and future
structural deficiencies based upon analysis of current conditions and projected
future deterioration, and recommend program funding levels and specific actions
necessary to preserve the structural integrity of the state highway system
consistent with adopted objectives. Lowest life cycle cost methodologies
must be used in developing a pavement management system. This element
shall serve as the basis for the preservation component of the six-year highway
program and the two-year biennial budget request to the legislature;

(b) A highway
maintenance element, establishing service levels for highway maintenance on
state-owned highways that meet benchmarks established by the transportation
commission. The highway maintenance element must include an estimate of costs
for achieving those service levels over twenty years. This element will serve
as the basis for the maintenance component of the six-year highway program and
the two-year biennial budget request to the legislature;

(c) A capacity
and operational improvement element, which shall establish operational
objectives, including safety considerations, for moving people and goods on the
state highway system, identify current and future capacity, operational, and
safety deficiencies, and recommend program funding levels and specific
improvements and strategies necessary to achieve the operational objectives.
In developing capacity and operational improvement plans the department shall
first assess strategies to enhance the operational efficiency of the existing
system before recommending system expansion. Strategies to enhance the
operational efficiencies include but are not limited to access management,
transportation system management, demand management, and high-occupancy vehicle
facilities. The capacity and operational improvement element must conform to
the state implementation plan for air quality and be consistent with regional
transportation plans adopted under chapter 47.80 RCW, and shall serve as the
basis for the capacity and operational improvement portions of the six-year
highway program and the two-year biennial budget request to the legislature;

(((c))) (d)
A scenic and recreational highways element, which shall identify and recommend
designation of scenic and recreational highways, provide for enhanced access to
scenic, recreational, and cultural resources associated with designated routes,
and recommend a variety of management strategies to protect, preserve, and
enhance these resources. The department, affected counties, cities, and towns,
regional transportation planning organizations, and other state or federal
agencies shall jointly develop this element;

(((d))) (e)
A paths and trails element, which shall identify the needs of nonmotorized
transportation modes on the state transportation systems and provide the basis
for the investment of state transportation funds in paths and trails, including
funding provided under chapter 47.30 RCW.

(2) The state ferry
system plan, which shall guide capital and operating investments in the state
ferry system. The plan shall establish service objectives for state ferry
routes, forecast travel demand for the various markets served in the system, ((and))
develop strategies for ferry system investment that consider regional and
statewide vehicle and passenger needs, support local land use plans, and assure
that ferry services are fully integrated with other transportation services. The
plan must provide for maintenance of capital assets. The plan must also
provide for preservation of capital assets based on lowest life cycle cost
methodologies. The plan shall assess the role of private ferries operating
under the authority of the utilities and transportation commission and shall
coordinate ferry system capital and operational plans with these private
operations. The ferry system plan must be consistent with the regional
transportation plans for areas served by the state ferry system, and shall be
developed in conjunction with the ferry advisory committees.

Sec. 414. RCW 47.06.090 and 1993 c
446 s 9 are each amended to read as follows:

The state-interest
component of the statewide multimodal transportation plan shall include an
intercity passenger rail plan, which shall analyze existing intercity passenger
rail service and recommend improvements to that service under the state
passenger rail service program including depot improvements, potential service
extensions, and ways to achieve higher train speeds.

For purposes of
maintaining and preserving any state-owned component of the state's passenger
rail program, the statewide multimodal transportation plan must identify all
such assets and provide a preservation plan based on lowest life cycle cost
methodologies.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
415. A new section is added
to chapter 81.112 RCW to read as follows:

As a condition of
receiving state funding, a regional transit authority shall submit a maintenance
and preservation management plan for certification by the transportation
commission or its successor entity. The plan must inventory all transportation
system assets within the direction and control of the transit authority, and
provide a plan for preservation of assets based on lowest life cycle cost
methodologies.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
416. A new section is added
to chapter 36.78 RCW to read as follows:

The board shall
establish a standard of good practice for maintenance of transportation system
assets. This standard must be implemented by all counties no later than
December 31, 2007. The board shall develop a model maintenance management
system for use by counties. The board shall develop rules to assist the counties
in the implementation of this system. Counties shall annually submit their
maintenance plans to the board. The board shall compile the county data
regarding maintenance management and annually submit it to the transportation
commission or its successor entity.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
417. Sections 401 through 404
of this act take effect July 1, 2002.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
418. If funding for sections
409, 410, and 412 of this act, referencing those sections by bill or chapter
number, is not provided by January 1, 2003, those sections are null and void.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
419. Captions and part headings
used in this act are not part of the law.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 420. If any provision of this
act or its application to any person or circumstance is held invalid, the
remainder of the act or the application of the provision to other persons or
circumstances is not affected.

---
END ---