BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF
WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec.
1. A new section is added
to chapter 90.58 RCW to read as follows:

(1) The guidelines
adopted by the department and master programs developed or amended by local
governments according to RCW 90.58.080 shall not require modification of or
limit agricultural activities occurring on agricultural lands. In
jurisdictions where agricultural activities occur, master programs developed or
amended after the effective date of this act shall include provisions
addressing new agricultural activities on land not meeting the definition of
agricultural land, conversion of agricultural lands to other uses, and
development not meeting the definition of agricultural activities. Nothing in
this section limits or changes the terms of the current exception to the definition
of substantial development in RCW 90.58.030(3)(e)(iv). This section applies
only to this chapter.

(2) For the purposes of
this section:

(a) "Agricultural
activities" means agricultural uses and practices including, but not
limited to: Producing, breeding, or increasing agricultural products; rotating
and changing agricultural crops; allowing land used for agricultural activities
to lie fallow in which it is plowed and tilled but left unseeded; allowing land
used for agricultural activities to lie dormant as a result of adverse
agricultural market conditions; allowing land used for agricultural activities
to lie dormant because the land is enrolled in a local, state, or federal
conservation program, or the land is subject to a conservation easement;
conducting agricultural operations; maintaining, repairing, and replacing
agricultural equipment; maintaining, repairing, and replacing agricultural
facilities, provided that the replacement facility is no closer to the
shoreline than the original facility; and maintaining agricultural lands under
production or cultivation;

(b) "Agricultural
products" includes but is not limited to horticultural, viticultural,
floricultural, vegetable, fruit, berry, grain, hops, hay, straw, turf, sod,
seed, and apiary products; feed or forage for livestock; Christmas trees;
hybrid cottonwood and similar hardwood trees grown as crops and harvested
within twenty years of planting; and livestock including both the animals
themselves and animal products including but not limited to meat, upland
finfish, poultry and poultry products, and dairy products;

(c) "Agricultural
equipment" and "agricultural facilities" includes, but is not
limited to: (i) The following used in agricultural operations: Equipment;
machinery; constructed shelters, buildings, and ponds; fences; upland finfish rearing
facilities; water diversion, withdrawal, conveyance, and use equipment and
facilities including but not limited to pumps, pipes, tapes, canals, ditches,
and drains; (ii) corridors and facilities for transporting personnel,
livestock, and equipment to, from, and within agricultural lands; (iii) farm
residences and associated equipment, lands, and facilities; and (iv) roadside
stands and on-farm markets for marketing fruit or vegetables; and

(d) "Agricultural
land" means those specific land areas on which agriculture activities are
conducted.

(3) The department and
local governments shall assure that local shoreline master programs use
definitions consistent with the definitions in this section.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 2. The provisions of this
act do not become effective until the earlier of either January 1, 2004, or the
date the department of ecology amends or updates chapter 173-16 or 173-26 WAC.

---
END ---