BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF
WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec.
1. A new section is added
to chapter 82.36 RCW to read as follows:

(1) The department of
agriculture shall make available to motor fuel retailers as defined in RCW
19.120.010, at their request, an adhesive label stating the amount of
Washington state motor vehicle fuel tax levied and stating the amount of
federal motor vehicle fuel tax levied. The label must be in a large, easily
readable font. The fuel tax amounts must be stated in terms of the
cents-per-gallon of tax. The label should be resistant to rain, wind, and
other inclement weather.

(2) The
department of agriculture shall produce the labels identified in subsection (1)
of this section in the most cost-effective means available. These means may
include, but are not limited to, individually producing the labels if they can
be printed by a computer printer, placing the mass production of the labels out
to bid, or combining the information with other labels required to be placed on
motor fuel pumps. The department of agriculture may work in conjunction with
other state agencies or with the federal government or with local governments
in order to produce labels containing required information as efficiently as
possible.

--- END ---