BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF
WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec.
1. The legislature finds
that the rules adopted in 1990 in response to the passage of the federal forest
resources and conservation and shortage relief act did not provide any
mechanism to allow for any changes to these rules to reflect changes in federal
law. The legislature also finds that no state statutory authority exists for
these rules, and that the rules lack the authority to impose civil penalties.
The legislature further finds that the state of Washington has broad discretion
to develop a state timber sales program to implement the federal act, including
the discretion to impose, modify, or eliminate substitution restrictions on
unprocessed timber harvested from public lands.

The legislature finds
that the state of Washington and its political subdivisions sell large amounts
of timber from their public lands. Revenues from those timber sales are used
to support school construction, benefit the state's higher education
institutions, and provide assistance to other trust beneficiaries. The
legislature is concerned with the declining revenues that are being generated
for these trusts, and at the amount of timber that is being harvested from
public lands in Washington but being processed outside of the state.

It is the legislature's
intent to provide more flexibility in the operation of the timber substitution
rules in order to increase the potential amount of money that can benefit the
trusts, provide mills within Washington state with a more certain wood supply,
give necessary rule-making authority to a state agency to adopt necessary
changes to the timber substitution rules, and to statutorily authorize the
timber substitution rules.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
2. The definitions in this
section apply throughout this chapter unless the context clearly requires
otherwise.

(1) "Agency"
means the state, its agencies or instrumentalities, or unit of local government
that owns or manages land from which timber is harvested in the state of
Washington.

(2)
"Department" means the department of revenue.

(3) "Export"
means either to load on a conveyance or vessel or put in a log raft with the
intent to ship to a foreign destination, or to place at a facility such as a
port, yard, pond, or dock with the intent to load on a conveyance or vessel or
put in a log raft for shipment to a foreign destination.

(4) "Export
restricted open timber sales" means a timber sale of export restricted
timber offered by an agency under section 7 of this act in which the prohibitions
against substitution do not apply.

(5) "Export
restricted timber" means unprocessed timber originating from a sale of
timber from public lands that has been designated as export restricted under
section 3 of this act, and includes both logs and stumpage originating from
such a sale.

(6) "Federal
forest resources conservation and shortage relief act" or "act"
means the federal forest resources conservation and shortage relief act of 1990
(16 U.S.C. Sec. 1620 et seq.) as now or hereafter amended.

(7) "Person"
means any individual, partnership, corporation, association, or other legal
entity and includes any subsidiary, subcontractor, parent company, and business
affiliates where one affiliate controls or has the power to control the other or
when both are controlled directly or indirectly by a third person.

(8) "Processing
facility" means a facility for converting unprocessed timber into any of
the items of processed timber as defined by the department by rule. Chip
plants, pulp mills, and facilities that process only western red cedar products
are not considered processing facilities.

(9) "Public
lands" means lands in the state of Washington that are held or owned by
the state of Washington, an agency or instrumentality of the state, or unit of
local government within the state.

(10)
"Purchaser" means a person who has been awarded a timber sale
contract to harvest or acquire export restricted timber from public lands in
the state of Washington.

(11)
"Substitution" means the purchase of export restricted timber or
possession of an active sale contract for export restricted timber: (a) By a
person who owns and operates a domestic processing facility within the United
States; (b) where the person owning the processing facility also exports or
sells for export from the United States unprocessed timber originating from
private lands in Washington, Oregon, or Idaho; and (c) where the lands are
owned by the person, or the person has exclusive rights to harvest timber from
the lands, where the rights may be exercised at any time during a period of
more than seven years.

(12) "Unit of
local government" means any county, city, town, special district,
municipal corporation, or quasi-municipal corporation in the state of
Washington.

(13) "Unprocessed
timber" means trees or portions of trees or other roundwood not processed
to standards and specifications suitable for end product use. Unprocessed
timber does not include timber processed into any one of the exemptions
contained in section 620e(9)(B) of the federal forest resources conservation
and shortage relief act from the federal definition of unprocessed timber.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
3. Each agency managing
public lands subject to this chapter must designate its timber sales as export
restricted until such time as the restrictions are changed. An order issued by
the secretary of commerce of the United States remains in effect until revised
by order of the secretary.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
4. (1) No person may export
from the United States export restricted timber. No person may sell, trade,
exchange, or otherwise convey export restricted timber to any other person for
the purpose of export from the United States.

(2) Except as
specifically provided under this chapter:

(a) No person may
purchase or possess an active contract for export restricted timber from an
agency if the person owns and operates a processing facility and the processing
of export restricted timber at the facility by such a person would constitute
substitution;

(b) No person may
purchase from another person export restricted timber if the person is
prohibited under (a) of this subsection from purchasing the timber directly
from the agency managing the public lands from which the timber originated.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
5. The prohibition against
substitution in section 4 of this act does not apply to:

(1) The use of timber
originating from public lands that is either hardwood timber or western red
cedar;

(2) The sale of up to
fifty percent of the volume in any sale purchased in calendar year 2002 or
thereafter to a person or persons who are otherwise ineligible under section 4
of this act to purchase export restricted timber, but only if the timber is
processed at a domestic facility. Hardwoods, western red cedar, and logs
described in subsection (4) of this section are not considered as part of the
volume within a sale under this exemption. The transferor must notify the department
in writing of such a transaction prior to physically transferring the timber to
the transferee. Rights to purchase export restricted timber under this
subsection may be used on a sale-by-sale basis and may not be accumulated or
transferred to other sales. The advertised volume or volume specified in the
sale agreement must serve as the basis for determining the sale volume to which
the percentage applies;

(3) The purchase by any
person of export restricted timber originating from public lands east of the
crest of the Cascade mountain range if such a person does not export or sell
for export timber from private lands in that geographic area. However, a
person located east of the crest of the Cascade mountain range who was
ineligible to purchase export restricted timber east of the Columbia river
under the regulations in effect upon January 1, 2002, may not bid on export
restricted timber sales of timber located in the Loomis forest until July 1,
2004, unless some other exemption contained in this section applies to those
timber sales;

(4) A log, regardless
of gross scale, sold to a domestic processing facility for the purpose of
conversion into chips, pulp, or pulp products;

(5) The sale of timber
for salvage or forest health that includes trees that have suffered damage from
fire, insects, disease, wind, ice, volcanic, or other biological or geological
event;

(6) The sale of
thinnings and small patch clear-cuts; or

(7) Situations that the
department has determined constitute exceptional circumstances so that the
seven-year restriction contained in section 2(11)(c) of this act, relating to a
person's rights to exclusively harvest timber from privately owned lands at any
time during a period of more than seven years, does not apply. The department
must make such determinations on a case-by-case basis.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
6. An agency must accept
bids from persons not otherwise eligible to bid on sales of export restricted
timber for the purpose of opening these bids on a contingent basis. Bids
received from otherwise ineligible persons may be opened only if the agency
receives less than three bids on the proposed timber sale from eligible
bidders. Once opened, contingent bids are treated in the same manner as if the
bid had been received from a person who is eligible to bid on export restricted
timber. If the agency does receive bids from at least three persons who are
eligible to bid on export restricted timber sales, all contingent bids received
by the agency must be returned to the bidder unopened.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
7. (1) The legislature finds
that there is some disagreement regarding the impacts that may result from
increasing the number of eligible bidders on public sales of export restricted
timber. The legislature believes that it is in the public interest and for the
benefit of the general welfare of the citizens of the state to relax the state
timber substitution rules by allowing a partial phase‑in of eligible
bidders over a ten‑year period.

(2) Beginning July 1,
2002, or as soon thereafter if approval of the secretary of commerce under 16
U.S.C. Sec. 620c(d)(2) is required, each agency selling timber must designate
twenty‑five percent of its annual sales volume as export restricted open
timber sales. The prohibition against substitution does not apply to export
restricted open timber sales. However, all timber harvested from public lands
pursuant to an export restricted open timber sale must still be processed
domestically. On July 1, 2007, each agency selling timber must designate
thirty‑eight percent of its annual sales volume as export restricted open
timber sales. On July 1, 2012, each agency selling timber must designate fifty
percent of its annual sales volume as export restricted open timber sales.

(3) Each agency must,
to the greatest extent possible, distribute the sales under this section
proportionately throughout the geographic area of land owned or managed by the
agency. The timber originating from sales under this section must be
representative of the species and grade distribution of the agency's sales
program.

(4) Each agency selling
timber must collect information on an annual basis on the volume, sales prices,
number of bidders, and the species, grade, and geographic distribution of sales
sold as export restricted open timber sales and sales sold subject to the
prohibition against substitution. The agencies must forward this information
to the department of natural resources. The department of natural resources
must maintain this information and submit a report summarizing this information
to the appropriate legislative committees by January 1, 2008. The department
of natural resources must submit a follow‑up report to the appropriate
legislative committees by January 1, 2013. In addition to the summary of
timber sales data, the department of natural resources must include information
regarding how making more bidders eligible to bid on export restricted timber
affects the income to the trusts, impacts workers and processing facilities in
Washington's forest products industry, and affects the agencies selling the
public timber. The department, the department of trade and economic
development, and other state agencies must provide any information they have that
is necessary for these reports to the department of natural resources.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
8. (1) The department must
develop and issue uniform forms, including a primary purchaser certification
form and a transferee certification form, for purposes of submission under
section 9 of this act. Each certification form must be signed and affirmed
with a notification, conspicuously placed, that the making of a false statement
on the certification is punishable as a gross misdemeanor under RCW 9A.72.040.
The certification forms shall affirm, under penalty of law, the truth of each
of the following:

(a) That the timber,
while still in unprocessed form, will not be:

(i) Exported by the
purchaser or used in substitution by the purchaser; or

(ii) Transferred to any
other person for the purpose either of export or to be used in substitution;

(b) That hammer brands
and paint applied to the timber as required by this chapter and by rule remain
on the timber until it is domestically processed;

(c) That prior to
selling, trading, exchanging, or otherwise conveying any timber that is export
restricted timber to any other person, the purchaser (transferor) must require
the transferee to provide to the purchaser a signed copy of a completed
transferee certification developed by the department; and that the purchaser
must provide the department with one copy not later than five days after
receipt from the transferee; and

(d) That the purchaser
must not sell, trade, exchange, or otherwise convey export restricted timber in
violation of this chapter to any person identified on the list of ineligible
purchasers published by the department under this chapter.

The certification forms
must also include all necessary provisions to account for exemptions allowed
under section 5 of this act.

(2) Copies of all
certifications and forms received by the department must be available for
public inspection at reasonable hours and locations.

(3) In developing and
implementing a program to audit compliance with this chapter, the department
may audit certifications or other forms submitted by any person in order to
ensure that the person is able to account for the disposition of all export
restricted timber that the person has purchased from a public agency or
received by means of transfer from another person.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
9. (1) Prior to issuing a
contract for the sale of export restricted timber, an agency that has offered
the timber for sale must require that the purchaser submit a signed copy of any
completed certification forms developed by the department.

(2) An agency must
submit a copy of the purchaser's forms to the department no later than five
days after the receipt of the purchaser's forms pursuant to this section. The
agency must make copies of the reports available to the public at reasonable
times and locations.

(3) A person possessing
export restricted timber must, prior to selling, trading, exchanging, or
otherwise conveying the timber to another person, require the transferee to
provide to the transferor a signed copy of a completed transferee certification
form developed by the department. The transferee certification must include an
affirmation, under penalty of law, as to the truth of each of the items
required to be affirmed in a purchaser certification, as well as the quantity
of export restricted timber that is being transferred.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
10. (1) The department must
establish and maintain a list of persons who, due to violations of this
chapter, are ineligible to purchase export restricted timber. The department
must add a person's name to the list if it finds, or has been notified by an
agency, that the person has violated the provisions relating to the prohibition
against exports, the prohibition against substitution, or the limitation on
indirect transactions. A person must be removed from the list after the period
of time has elapsed as is required under the debarment order issued under
section 12 of this act.

(2) The department must
post a copy of the list of ineligible purchasers on its web site and provide a
copy of this list, either electronically or in writing at the requesting
person's option, to each person who requests to receive copies of the list.
Upon a request for future updated copies of the list, the department must
provide revised copies of the list to all of these persons whenever a person is
added to or removed from the list.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
11. Agencies contracting for
the sale of export restricted timber from public lands must include in the
contracts clauses incorporating the applicable requirements relating to the
prohibitions on export and substitution, reporting, and enforcement. In
addition, the contracts must include clauses that provide that a violation by
the purchaser of the prohibitions relating to the prohibitions on export and
substitution are sufficient cause for the agency to cancel the contract.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
12. (1) If the department
finds that a person has violated any provisions of this chapter, or any rule
implementing this chapter, the department must provide written notice of the
violation to the person and provide the person an opportunity to be heard
concerning the department's findings. The person must have an opportunity to
contest the department's findings or explain any mitigating circumstances. If
a person fails to respond to the notice, or the department determines after the
hearing that a provision of this chapter or a rule implementing this chapter
was violated, the department may impose the following civil penalties:

(a) For exporting
unprocessed export restricted public timber, a fine not to exceed fifty
thousand dollars for each violation that the person should have known
constituted a violation;

(b) For exporting
unprocessed export restricted public timber, a fine not to exceed five hundred
thousand dollars for each violation the person committed willfully;

(c) For all other
violations:

(i) A fine not to
exceed twenty-five thousand dollars for each violation the person should have
known constituted a violation;

(ii) A fine not to
exceed one hundred thousand dollars for each violation the person committed
willfully; and

(iii) A fine not to
exceed ten thousand dollars for a minor violation that is not an intentional
violation, involves a single contract, purchase order, processing facility, or
log yard involving a quantity of less than twenty‑five logs and has a
total value of less than ten thousand dollars.

(2) The department must
adopt by rule standards for determining the civil penalties to be imposed.
These standards may be based upon the value of the timber involved, the
duration of the violation, the frequency of the violations, any previous
violations, and other facts and circumstances the department determines are
relevant to set the civil penalties under this section.

(3) A person who
willfully violates any of the prohibitions contained in section 4 of this act
pertaining to export, substitution, or indirect transactions must be debarred,
by an order issued by the department, from bidding on or purchasing export
restricted timber originating from any public lands covered by this chapter for
a period of two years.

(4) A second debarment
of any person under this section, which is for a violation by the same person
committed after the first debarment of the person under this section, will
result in a debarment of the person from bidding on or purchasing export
restricted timber for a period of five years.

(5) If the department
becomes aware of a violation, or possible violation, of the prohibitions
relating to export, substitution, or certain indirect transactions, it must
notify the managing agency so that the agency may promptly take appropriate
action, as provided in this chapter.

(6) The Washington
administrative procedure act, chapter 34.05 RCW, applies to the issuance of any
order by the department, or any determination by the department that a
violation of any of the prohibitions contained in section 4 of this act
pertaining to export, substitution, or indirect transactions has occurred.
Agencies other than state agencies must follow appropriate procedures in
issuing an order for a violation of the prohibitions contained in section 4 of
this act pertaining to export, substitution, or indirect transactions.

(7) For the purposes of
this section, the term "person" includes any previously formed but no
longer existing entity that would be included in section 2(7) of this act if
the entity were in existence.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
13. (1) The department is
responsible for the proper administration of this chapter. The department has
the authority to adopt all rules to implement this chapter. The department
also has the authority to administer and otherwise modify chapter 240-15 WAC,
as recodified pursuant to section 14(2) of this act, to ensure that it is
consistent with the provisions of this chapter. The department may undertake
studies, analysis, or research necessary to carry out the provisions of this
chapter. The department may also enter into all necessary contracts and accept
any gifts, grants, or funds for the purposes of this chapter.

(2) The department must
develop and implement a program for the monitoring of export restricted timber
in transit and at ports and other facilities for the purpose of ensuring that
export restricted timber is not exported from the United States or used in
substitution. This monitoring program may also include requests for
information on the processing and transfer of timber grown by the purchaser
within Washington, Oregon, and Idaho. The purchaser must maintain reasonable
records regarding the processing and transfers of its timber and produce these
records at the request of the department. The department may enter into
contracts or agreements with other appropriate state, federal, or other public
authorities for the purpose of meeting the monitoring requirements of this
section.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
14. (1) The legislature finds
that the rules pertaining to timber substitution have been established within
the Washington Administrative Code since 1990. The legislature also finds that
these rules were adopted without the benefit of state statutes providing
direction for these rules. The legislature is concerned that there will be
considerable disruption to the timber substitution program if the department is
required to adopt rules to administer a program it is already administering.
The legislature further recognizes that all details contained in agency rules
are not appropriate for codification into statute because efficiencies in
administration may allow for such improvements as simpler reporting
requirements. Future efficiencies could reduce the burden for the department,
the government agencies calling for bids and issuing timber contracts, and the
timber community. Therefore, this section gives effect to the rules adopted by
the governor in chapter 240-15 WAC without requiring the readoption of these
rules or the preparation of small business economic impact statements by the
department. The absence of language contained within that chapter of
regulations concerning this chapter may not be construed as an intent by the
legislature to change or repeal the requirements of chapter 240-15 WAC as it
existed on January 1, 2002. Only those provisions of chapter 240-15 WAC that
are clearly inconsistent with the provisions and purposes of this chapter may
be considered no longer in effect. The legislature intends by the adoption of
this chapter to expand the current exemptions from the substitution rules, to
give the department the necessary rule-making authority to administer this
chapter, to create a pilot program, and to place the current system into
statute.

(2) The code reviser's
office must recodify the rules contained in chapter 240-15 WAC as a separate
chapter under the responsibility of the department. The department must issue
an interpretive statement that discusses any changes in the current
administration of the timber substitution rules program. The interpretive
statement must also describe which, if any, of these changes will be subject to
a rule-making proceeding under chapter 34.05 RCW. The code reviser's office
must publish this interpretive statement in the Washington State Register.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
15. (1) This chapter does not
apply to the extent that an order issued by the secretary of commerce of the
United States under the federal forest resources conservation and shortage
relief act is suspended, removed, or modified by the president of the United
States, or the federal act is modified or repealed by congress.

(2) If federal law
establishes a partial ban instead of a total ban on the export of unprocessed
timber originating from public lands, then sales designated by an agency as
export restricted must be distributed proportionately throughout the
geographical area of land owned or managed by the agency. Timber originating
from sales designated as export restricted must be representative of the
species and grade distribution of the agency's sale program. Designation of
timber sales as export restricted and as exportable must be on a sale‑by‑sale
basis and apply to the entire sale being considered. However, a sale must be
subdivided into portions that are export restricted and exportable if there are
insufficient sales in the annual sales program to ensure that designation on a
sale‑by‑sale basis meets the applicable requirements of the federal
act. By March 31st of each year, each agency selling timber from public lands
must report to the department on the results of its sales program for the
preceding calendar year. The report must include information on the volume,
species, grade, and geographical distribution of sales sold as export
restricted and nonexport restricted.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
16. The governor shall submit
this chapter to the secretary of commerce for approval under 16 U.S.C. Sec.
620c(d)(2). The governor must also provide any information reasonably
requested by the secretary of commerce to determine whether the state's program
complies with all requirements of federal law. If the secretary of commerce
disapproves the state's program as submitted, the department must notify the
governor and the appropriate legislative committees of the secretary's
disapproval and inform them of those deficiencies in the program identified by
the secretary of commerce.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
17. If any provision of this
act or its application to any person or circumstance is held invalid, the
remainder of the act or the application of the provision to other persons or
circumstances is not affected.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
18. Sections 7 and 14 of this
act take effect July 1, 2002. The remainder of this act takes effect upon the
approval of this act by the secretary of commerce under 16 U.S.C. Sec.
620c(d)(2).

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 19. Sections 1 through 18 of
this act constitute a new chapter in Title 79 RCW.

---
END ---