BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF
WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1. RCW 18.30.010 and 1995 c
1 s 2 are each amended to read as follows:

Unless the context
clearly requires otherwise, the definitions in this section apply throughout
this chapter.

(1) "Board"
means the Washington state board of ((denture technology)) denturists.

(2) "Denture"
means a removable full or partial upper or lower dental appliance to be worn in
the mouth to replace missing natural teeth.

(3)
"Denturist" means a person licensed under this chapter to engage in
the practice of denturism.

(4)
"Department" means the department of health.

(5) "Practice of
denturism" means:

(a) Making, placing,
constructing, altering, reproducing, or repairing a denture; and

(b) Taking impressions
and furnishing or supplying a denture directly to a person or advising the use
of a denture, and maintaining a facility for the same.

(6)
"Secretary" means the secretary of health or the secretary's
designee.

Sec. 2. RCW 18.30.020 and 1995 c
198 s 18 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) Before making and
fitting a denture, a denturist shall examine the patient's oral cavity.

(a) If the examination
gives the denturist reasonable cause to believe that there is an abnormality or
disease process that requires medical or dental treatment, the denturist shall
immediately refer the patient to a dentist or physician. In such cases, the
denturist shall take no further action to manufacture or place a denture until
the patient has been examined by a dentist or physician and the dentist or
physician gives written clearance that the denture will pose no threat to the patient's
health.

(b) If the examination
reveals the need for tissue or teeth modification in order to assure proper fit
of a full or partial denture, the denturist shall refer the patient to a
dentist and assure that the modification has been completed before taking an
impression for the completion of the denture.

(2) A denturist who
makes or places a denture in a manner not consistent with this section is
subject to the sanctions provided in chapter 18.130 RCW, the uniform
disciplinary act.

(3) A denturist must
successfully complete special training in oral pathology prescribed by the ((secretary))
board, whether as part of an approved associate degree program or
equivalent training, and pass an examination prescribed by the ((secretary))
board, which may be a part of the examination for licensure to become a
licensed denturist.

Sec. 3. RCW 18.30.040 and 1995 c
1 s 5 are each amended to read as follows:

Nothing in this chapter
prohibits or restricts:

(1) The practice of a
profession by an individual who is licensed, certified, or registered under
other laws of this state and who is performing services within the authorized
scope of practice;

(2) The practice of
denturism by an individual employed by the government of the United States
while the individual is engaged in the performance of duties prescribed by the
laws and regulations of the United States;

(3) The practice of
denturism by students enrolled in a school approved by the ((department))
board. The performance of services must be pursuant to a course of
instruction or an assignment from an instructor and under the supervision of an
instructor; or

(4) Work performed by
dental labs and dental technicians under the written prescription of a dentist.

Sec. 4. RCW 18.30.050 and 1995 c
1 s 6 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) The Washington
state board of ((denture technology)) denturists is created. The
board shall consist of seven members appointed by the secretary as follows:

(a) Four members of the
board must be denturists licensed under this chapter, except initial
appointees, who must have five years' experience in the field of denturism or a
related field.

(b) Two members shall
be selected from persons who are not affiliated with any health care profession
or facility, at least one of whom must be over sixty-five years of age
representing the elderly.

(c) One member must be
a dentist licensed in the state of Washington.

(2) The members of the
board shall serve for terms of three years. The terms of the initial members
shall be staggered, with the members appointed under subsection (1)(a) of this
section serving two-year and three-year terms initially and the members
appointed under subsection (1)(b) and (c) of this section serving one-year,
two-year, and three-year terms initially. Vacancies shall be filled in the
same manner as the original appointments are made. Appointments to fill
vacancies shall be for the remainder of the unexpired term of the vacant
position.

(3) No appointee may
serve more than two consecutive terms.

(4) Members of the
board shall be reimbursed for travel expenses under RCW 43.03.050 and
43.03.060.

(5) A member of the
board may be removed for just cause by the secretary.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
5. A new section is added
to chapter 18.30 RCW to read as follows:

The board shall:

(1) Determine the
qualifications of persons applying for licensure under this chapter;

(2) Prescribe,
administer, and determine the requirements for examinations under this chapter
and establish a passing grade for licensure under this chapter;

(3) Adopt rules under
chapter 34.05 RCW to carry out the provisions of this chapter in consultation
and in agreement with the secretary; and

(4) Evaluate and
approve those schools from which graduation is accepted as proof of an
applicant's completion of coursework requirements for licensure.

Sec. 6. RCW 18.30.090 and 1995 c
198 s 20 are each amended to read as follows:

The secretary shall
issue a license to practice denturism to an applicant who submits a completed
application, pays the appropriate fees, and meets the following requirements:

(1) A person currently
licensed to practice denturism under statutory provisions of another state,
territory of the United States, District of Columbia, or Puerto Rico, with
substantially equivalent licensing standards to this chapter shall be licensed
without examination upon providing the department with the following:

(a) Proof of
successfully passing a written and clinical examination for denturism in a
state, territory of the United States, District of Columbia, or Puerto Rico,
that the ((secretary)) board has determined has substantially
equivalent licensing standards as those in this chapter ((in)),
including but not limited to both the written and clinical examinations;
and

(b) An affidavit from
the ((state)) licensing agency where the person is licensed or
certified attesting to the fact of the person's licensure or certification.

(2) A person graduating
from a formal denturism program shall be licensed if he or she:

(a) Documents
successful completion of formal training with a major course of study in
denturism of not less than two years in duration at an educational institution
((recognized)) approved by the ((secretary)) board;
and

(b) Passes a written
and clinical examination approved by the ((secretary)) board.

(((3) An applicant
who does not otherwise qualify under subsection (1) or (2) of this section
shall be licensed within two years of December 8, 1994, if he or she:

(a) Provides to the
secretary three affidavits by persons other than family members attesting to
the applicant's employment in denture technology for at least five years, or
provides documentation of at least four thousand hours of practical work within
denture technology;

(b) Provides
documentation of successful completion of a training course approved by the
secretary or completion of an equivalent course approved by the secretary; and

(c) Passes a written
and clinical examination administered by the secretary.))

Sec. 7. RCW 18.30.100 and 1995 c
198 s 21 are each amended to read as follows:

The ((secretary))
board shall administer the examinations for licensing under this
chapter, subject to the following requirements:

(1) Examinations shall
determine the qualifications, fitness, and ability of the applicant to practice
denturism. The test shall include a written examination and a practical demonstration
of skills.

(2) Examinations shall
be held at least annually.

(3) The first
examination shall be conducted not later than July 1, 1995.

(4) The written
examination shall cover the following subjects: (a) Head and oral anatomy and
physiology; (b) oral pathology; (c) partial denture construction and design;
(d) microbiology; (e) clinical dental technology; (f) dental laboratory
technology; (g) clinical jurisprudence; (h) asepsis; (i) medical emergencies;
and (j) cardiopulmonary resuscitation.

(5) Upon payment of the
appropriate fee, an applicant who fails either the written or practical
examination may have additional opportunities to take the portion of the
examination that he or she failed.

The secretary may hire
trained persons licensed under this chapter to prepare, administer, and grade
the examinations or may contract with regional examiners who meet
qualifications adopted by the ((secretary)) board.

Sec. 8. RCW 18.30.140 and 1995 c
198 s 24 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) An individual may
place his or her license on inactive status. The holder of an inactive license
shall not practice denturism in this state without first activating the
license.

(2) ((The inactive
renewal fee shall be established by the secretary. Failure to renew an
inactive license shall result in cancellation in the same manner as failure to
renew an active license results in cancellation.

(3))) An inactive license may be placed in an active
status upon compliance with rules established by the ((secretary)) board.

(((4))) (3)
The provisions relating to denial, suspension, and revocation of a license are
applicable to an inactive license, except that when proceedings to suspend or
revoke an inactive license have been initiated, the license shall remain
inactive until the proceedings have been completed.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 9. RCW 18.30.080 (Secretary--Powers and
duties) and 1995 c 198 s 19 & 1995 c 1 s 9 are each repealed.

---
END ---