BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF
WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1. RCW 79.90.215 and 1990 c
163 s 2 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) To determine the
"highest responsible bidder" under RCW 79.90.210, the department of
natural resources shall be entitled to consider, in addition to price, the
following:

(a) The financial and
technical ability of the bidder to perform the contract;

(b) Whether the bid
contains material defects;

(c) Whether the bidder
has previously or is currently complying with terms and conditions of any other
contracts with the state or relevant contracts with entities other than the
state;

(d) Whether the
bidder was the "highest responsible bidder" for a sale within the
previous five years but failed to complete the sale, such as by not entering
into a resulting contract or by not paying the difference between the deposit
and the total amount due;

(e) Whether the
bidder has been convicted of a crime relating to the public lands or natural
resources of the state of Washington, the United States, or any other state,
tribe, or country, where "conviction" shall include a guilty plea, or
unvacated forfeiture of bail;

(((e))) (f)
Whether the bidder is owned, controlled, or managed by any person, partnership,
or corporation that is not responsible under this statute; and

(((f))) (g)
Whether the subcontractors of the bidder, if any, are responsible under this
statute.

(2)
Whenever the department has reason to believe that the apparent high bidder is
not a responsible bidder, the department may award the sale to the next
responsible bidder or the department may reject all bids pursuant to RCW
79.90.240.

--- END ---