BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF
WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1. RCW 76.13.110 and 2001 c
280 s 1 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) The department of
natural resources shall establish and maintain a small forest landowner
office. The small forest landowner office shall be a resource and focal point
for small forest landowner concerns and policies, and shall have significant
expertise regarding the management of small forest holdings, governmental
programs applicable to such holdings, and the forestry riparian easement
program.

(2) The small forest
landowner office shall administer the provisions of the forestry riparian
easement program created under RCW 76.13.120. ((With respect to that
program, the office shall have the authority to contract with private
consultants that the office finds qualified to perform timber cruises of
forestry riparian easements or to lay out streamside buffers and comply with
other forest and fish regulatory requirements related to the forest riparian
easement program.))

(3) The small forest
landowner office shall assist in the development of small landowner options
through alternate management plans or alternate harvest restrictions
appropriate to small landowners. The small forest landowner office shall
develop criteria to be adopted by the forest practices board in rules and a
manual for alternate management plans or alternate harvest restrictions. These
alternate plans or alternate harvest restrictions shall meet riparian functions
while requiring less costly regulatory prescriptions. At the landowner's
option, alternate plans or alternate harvest restrictions may be used to
further meet riparian functions.

The small forest
landowner office shall evaluate the cumulative impact of such alternate
management plans or alternate harvest restrictions on essential riparian
functions at the subbasin or watershed level. The small forest landowner
office shall adjust future alternate management plans or alternate harvest
restrictions in a manner that will minimize the negative impacts on essential
riparian functions within a subbasin or watershed.

(4) An advisory
committee is established to assist the small forest landowner office in
developing policy and recommending rules to the forest practices board. The
advisory committee shall consist of seven members, including a representative
from the department of ecology, the department of fish and wildlife, and a
tribal representative. Four additional committee members shall be small forest
landowners who shall be appointed by the commissioner of public lands from a
list of candidates submitted by the board of directors of the Washington farm
forestry association or its successor organization. The association shall
submit more than one candidate for each position. The commissioner shall
designate two of the initial small forest landowner appointees to serve
five-year terms and the other two small forest landowner appointees to serve
four-year terms. Thereafter, appointees shall serve for a term of four
years. The small forest landowner office shall review draft rules or rule
concepts with the committee prior to recommending such rules to the forest
practices board. The office shall reimburse nongovernmental committee members
for reasonable expenses associated with attending committee meetings as
provided in RCW 43.03.050 and 43.03.060.

(5) By December 1,
2002, the small forest landowner office shall provide a report to the board and
the legislature containing:

(a) Estimates of the
amounts of nonindustrial forests and woodlands in holdings of twenty acres or
less, twenty-one to one hundred acres, one hundred to one thousand acres, and
one thousand to five thousand acres, in western Washington and eastern
Washington, and the number of persons having total nonindustrial forest and
woodland holdings in those size ranges;

(b) Estimates of the
number of parcels of nonindustrial forests and woodlands held in contiguous
ownerships of twenty acres or less, and the percentages of those parcels
containing improvements used: (i) As primary residences for half or more of
most years; (ii) as vacation homes or other temporary residences for less than
half of most years; and (iii) for other uses;

(c) The watershed
administrative units in which significant portions of the riparian areas or
total land area are nonindustrial forests and woodlands;

(d) Estimates of the
number of forest practices applications and notifications filed per year for
forest road construction, silvicultural activities to enhance timber growth,
timber harvest not associated with conversion to nonforest land uses, with
estimates of the number of acres of nonindustrial forests and woodlands on
which forest practices are conducted under those applications and
notifications; and

(e) Recommendations on
ways the board and the legislature could provide more effective incentives to
encourage continued management of nonindustrial forests and woodlands for
forestry uses in ways that better protect salmon, other fish and wildlife,
water quality, and other environmental values.

(6) By December 1,
2004, and every four years thereafter, the small forest landowner office shall
provide to the board and the legislature an update of the report described in
subsection (5) of this section, containing more recent information and
describing:

(a) Trends in the items
estimated under subsection (5)(a) through (d) of this section;

(b) Whether, how, and
to what extent the forest practices act and rules contributed to those trends;
and

(c) Whether, how, and
to what extent: (i) The board and legislature implemented recommendations made
in the previous report; and (ii) implementation of or failure to implement
those recommendations affected those trends.

Sec. 2. RCW 76.13.120 and 2001 c
280 s 2 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) The legislature
finds that the state should acquire easements along riparian and other
sensitive aquatic areas from small forest landowners willing to sell or donate
such easements to the state provided that the state will not be required to
acquire such easements if they are subject to unacceptable liabilities. The
legislature therefore establishes a forestry riparian easement program.

(2) The definitions in
this subsection apply throughout this section and RCW 76.13.100 and 76.13.110
unless the context clearly requires otherwise.

(a) "Forestry
riparian easement" means an easement covering qualifying timber granted
voluntarily to the state by a small forest landowner.

(b) "Qualifying
timber" means those trees covered by a forest practices application that
the small forest landowner is required to leave unharvested under the rules
adopted under RCW 76.09.055 and 76.09.370 or that is made uneconomic to harvest
by those rules, and for which the small landowner is willing to grant the state
a forestry riparian easement. "Qualifying timber" is timber within
or bordering a commercially reasonable harvest unit as determined under rules
adopted by the forest practices board, or timber for which an approved forest
practices application for timber harvest cannot be obtained because of
restrictions under the forest practices rules.

(c) "Small forest
landowner" means a landowner meeting all of the following
characteristics: (i) A forest landowner as defined in RCW 76.09.020 whose
interest in the land and timber is in fee or who has rights to the timber to be
included in the forestry riparian easement that extend at least fifty years
from the date the forest practices application associated with the easement is
submitted; (ii) an entity that has harvested from its own lands in this state
during the three years prior to the year of application an average timber
volume that would qualify the owner as a small ((timber)) harvester
under RCW ((84.33.073(1))) 84.33.035; and (iii) an entity that
certifies at the time of application that it does not expect to harvest from
its own lands more than the volume allowed by RCW ((84.33.073(1))) 84.33.035
during the ten years following application. If a landowner's prior three-year
average harvest exceeds the limit of RCW ((84.33.073(1))) 84.33.035,
or the landowner expects to exceed this limit during the ten years following
application, and that landowner establishes to the department of natural
resources' reasonable satisfaction that the harvest limits were or will be
exceeded to raise funds to pay estate taxes or equally compelling and
unexpected obligations such as court-ordered judgments or extraordinary medical
expenses, the landowner shall be deemed to be a small forest landowner.

For purposes of
determining whether a person qualifies as a small forest landowner, the small
forest landowner office, created in RCW 76.13.110, shall evaluate the landowner
under this definition as of the date that the forest practices application is
submitted or the date the landowner notifies the department that the harvest is
to begin with which the forestry riparian easement is associated. A small
forest landowner can include an individual, partnership, corporate, or other
nongovernmental legal entity. If a landowner grants timber rights to another
entity for less than five years, the landowner may still qualify as a small
forest landowner under this section. If a landowner is unable to obtain an
approved forest practices application for timber harvest for any of his or her
land because of restrictions under the forest practices rules, the landowner
may still qualify as a small forest landowner under this section.

(d) "Completion of
harvest" means that the trees have been harvested from an area and that
further entry into that area by mechanized logging or slash treating equipment
is not expected.

(3) The department of
natural resources is authorized and directed to accept and hold in the name of
the state of Washington forestry riparian easements granted by small forest
landowners covering qualifying timber and to pay compensation to such
landowners in accordance with subsections (6) and (7) of this section. The
department of natural resources may not transfer the easements to any entity
other than another state agency.

(4) Forestry riparian
easements shall be effective for fifty years from the date the forest practices
application associated with the qualifying timber is submitted to the
department of natural resources, unless the easement is terminated earlier by
the department of natural resources voluntarily, based on a determination that
termination is in the best interest of the state, or under the terms of a
termination clause in the easement.

(5) Forestry riparian
easements shall be restrictive only, and shall preserve all lawful uses of the
easement premises by the landowner that are consistent with the terms of the
easement and the requirement to protect riparian functions during the term of
the easement, subject to the restriction that the leave trees required by the
rules to be left on the easement premises may not be cut during the term of the
easement. No right of public access to or across, or any public use of the
easement premises is created by this statute or by the easement. Forestry
riparian easements shall not be deemed to trigger the compensating tax of or
otherwise disqualify land from being taxed under chapter 84.33 or 84.34 RCW.

(6) Upon application of
a small forest landowner for a riparian easement that is associated with a
forest practices application and the landowner's marking of the qualifying
timber on the qualifying lands, the small forest landowner office shall
determine the compensation to be offered to the small forest landowner as
provided for in this section. The small forest landowner office shall also
determine the compensation to be offered to a small forest landowner for qualifying
timber for which an approved forest practices application for timber harvest
cannot be obtained because of restrictions under the forest practices rules.
The legislature recognizes that there is not readily available market
transaction evidence of value for easements of this nature, and thus
establishes the following methodology to ascertain the value for forestry
riparian easements. Values so determined shall not be considered competent
evidence of value for any other purpose.

The small forest
landowner office shall establish the volume of the qualifying timber. Based on
that volume and using data obtained or maintained by the department of revenue
under RCW 84.33.074 and 84.33.091, the small forest landowner office shall
attempt to determine the fair market value of the qualifying timber as of the
date the forest practices application associated with the qualifying timber was
submitted or the date the landowner notifies the department that the harvest is
to begin. ((If, under the forest practices rules adopted under chapter 4,
Laws of 1999 sp. sess., some qualifying timber may be removed prior to the
expiration of the fifty-year term of the easement, the small forest landowner
office shall apply a reduced compensation factor to ascertain the value of
those trees based on the proportional economic value, considering income and
growth, lost to the landowner)) Removal of any qualifying timber before
the expiration of the easement must be in accordance with the forest practices
rules and the terms of the easement. There shall be no reduction in
compensation for reentry.

(7) Except as provided
in subsection (8) of this section, the small forest landowner office shall,
subject to available funding, offer compensation to the small forest landowner
in the amount of fifty percent of the value determined in subsection (6) of
this section, plus the compliance and reimbursement costs as determined
in accordance with RCW 76.13.140. If the landowner accepts the offer for
qualifying timber that will be harvested pursuant to an approved forest
practices application, the department of natural resources shall pay the
compensation promptly upon (a) completion of harvest in the area covered by the
forestry riparian easement; (b) verification that there has been compliance
with the rules requiring leave trees in the easement area; and (c) execution
and delivery of the easement to the department of natural resources. If the
landowner accepts the offer for qualifying timber for which an approved forest
practices application for timber harvest cannot be obtained because of
restrictions under the forest practices rules, the department of natural
resources shall pay the compensation promptly upon (i) verification that there
has been compliance with the rules requiring leave trees in the easement area;
and (ii) execution and delivery of the easement to the department of natural
resources. Upon donation or payment of compensation, the department of natural
resources may record the easement.

(8) For approved forest
practices applications where the regulatory impact is greater than the average
percentage impact for all small landowners as determined by the department of
natural resources analysis under the regulatory fairness act, chapter 19.85
RCW, the compensation offered will be increased to one hundred percent for that
portion of the regulatory impact that is in excess of the average. Regulatory
impact includes trees left in buffers, special management zones, and those
rendered uneconomic to harvest by these rules. A separate average or high
impact regulatory threshold shall be established for western and eastern
Washington. Criteria for these measurements and payments shall be established
by the small forest landowner office.

(9) The forest
practices board shall adopt rules under the administrative procedure act,
chapter 34.05 RCW, to implement the forestry riparian easement program,
including the following:

(a) A standard version
or versions of all documents necessary or advisable to create the forestry
riparian easements as provided for in this section;

(b) Standards for
descriptions of the easement premises with a degree of precision that is
reasonable in relation to the values involved;

(c) Methods and
standards for cruises and valuation of forestry riparian easements for purposes
of establishing the compensation. The department of natural resources shall
perform the timber cruises of forestry riparian easements required under this
chapter and chapter 76.09 RCW. Any rules concerning the methods and standards
for valuations of forestry riparian easements shall apply only to the
department of natural resources, small forest landowners, and the small forest
landowner office;

(d) A method to
determine that a forest practices application involves a commercially reasonable
harvest, and adopt criteria for entering into a forest riparian easement where
a commercially reasonable harvest is not possible or a forest practices
application that has been submitted cannot be approved because of restrictions
under the forest practices rules;

(e) A method to address
blowdown of qualified timber falling outside the easement premises;

(f) A formula for
sharing of proceeds in relation to the acquisition of qualified timber covered
by an easement through the exercise or threats of eminent domain by a federal
or state agency with eminent domain authority, based on the present value of
the department of natural resources' and the landowner's relative interests in
the qualified timber;

(g) High impact
regulatory thresholds;

(h) A method to
determine timber that is qualifying timber because it is rendered uneconomic to
harvest by the rules adopted under RCW 76.09.055 and 76.09.370; and

(i) A method for
internal department of natural resources review of small forest landowner
office compensation decisions under subsection (7) of this section.

Sec. 3. RCW 76.13.140 and 2001 c
280 s 3 are each amended to read as follows:

In order to assist
small forest landowners to remain economically viable, the legislature intends
that the small forest landowners be able to net fifty percent of the value of
the trees left in the buffer areas. The amount of compensation offered in RCW
76.13.120 shall also include the compliance costs for participation in the
riparian easement program. For purposes of this section, "compliance
costs" includes the cost of preparing and recording the easement, and any
business and occupation tax and real estate excise tax imposed because of
entering into the easement. The office may contract with private
consultants that the office finds qualified to perform timber cruises of
forestry riparian easements or to lay out streamside buffers and comply with
other forest and fish regulatory requirements related to the forest riparian
easement program. The department shall reimburse small forest landowners for
the actual costs incurred for laying out the streamside buffers and marking the
qualifying timber once a contract has been executed for the forestry riparian
easement program. Reimbursement is subject to the work being acceptable to the
department. The small forest landowner office shall determine how the
reimbursement costs will be calculated.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
4. A new section is added
to chapter 76.09 RCW to read as follows:

The legislature intends
that small forest landowners have access to alternate plan processes or
alternate harvest restrictions, or both if necessary, that meet the public
resource protection standard set forth in RCW 76.09.370(3), but which also
lowers the overall cost of regulation to small forest landowners including, but
not limited to, timber value forgone, layout costs, and operating costs. The
forest practices board shall consult with the small forest landowner office
advisory committee in developing these alternate approaches. By July 1, 2003,
the forest practices board shall provide the legislature with a written report
that describes the board's progress in developing alternate plan processes or
alternate harvest restrictions, or both if necessary, that meet legislative
intent.

As used in
this section, "small forest landowner" has the same meaning as
defined in RCW 76.13.120(2).

---
END ---