BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF
WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec.
1. The following acts or
parts of acts are each repealed:

(1) RCW 18.48.010 (Definitions) and 1996 c
81 s 2 & 1995 c 260 s 7;

(2) RCW 18.48.020 (Registration) and 2000 c
93 s 5, 1996 c 81 s 4, & 1995 c 260 s 8;

(3) RCW 18.48.030 (Application of uniform
disciplinary act) and 1995 c 260 s 9;

(4) RCW 18.48.050 (Elder
care--Professionalization of providers) and 1998 c 272 s 7; and

(5) RCW 18.48.060 (Advisory
committee--Composition--Vacancies--Meetings--Travel expenses--Civil immunity)
and 2000 c 171 s 18 & 1998 c 272 s 8.

Sec. 2. RCW 70.128.220 and 1998
c 272 s 9 are each amended to read as follows:

Adult family homes have
developed rapidly in response to the health and social needs of the aging
population in community settings, especially as the aging population has
increased in proportion to the general population. The growing demand for
elder care with a new focus on issues affecting senior citizens, including
persons with developmental disabilities, mental illness, or dementia, has
prompted a growing professionalization of adult family home providers to
address quality care and quality of life issues consistent with standards of
accountability and regulatory safeguards for the health and safety of the
residents. The establishment of an advisory ((committee)) board
to the ((department of health and the)) department of social and health
services under ((RCW 18.48.060)) section 3 of this act formalizes
a stable process for discussing and considering these issues among residents
and their advocates, regulatory officials, and adult family home providers.
The dialogue among all stakeholders interested in maintaining a healthy option
for the aging population in community settings assures the highest regard for
the well-being of these residents within a benign and functional regulatory
environment. The secretary shall be advised by an advisory ((committee))
board on adult family homes established under ((RCW 18.48.060)) section
3 of this act.

((Establishment of
the advisory committee shall not prohibit the department of social and health
services from utilizing other advisory activities that the department of social
and health services deems necessary for program development.))

NEW SECTION. Sec.
3. A new section is added
to chapter 70.128 RCW to read as follows:

(1) In an effort to
ensure a cooperative process among the department, adult family home provider
representatives, and resident and family representatives on matters pertaining
to the adult family home program, the secretary, or his or her designee, shall
designate an advisory board. The advisory board must include representatives
of the statewide adult family home associations and nonaffiliated providers,
the state long-term care ombudsman program, the statewide resident council
program, consumers, and family representatives. Depending on the topic to be
discussed, the department may invite other representatives in addition to the
named members of the advisory board. The secretary, or his or her designee,
shall periodically, but not less than quarterly, convene a meeting of the
advisory board to encourage open dialogue on matters affecting the adult family
home program. It is, minimally, expected that the department will discuss with
the advisory board the department's inspection, enforcement, and quality
improvement activities, in addition to seeking their comments and
recommendations on matters described under subsection (2) of this section.

(2) The secretary, or
his or her designee, shall seek comments and recommendations from the advisory board
prior to the adoption of rules and standards, implementation of adult family
home provider programs, or development of methods and rates of payment.

(3) Establishment of
the advisory board shall not prohibit the department of social and health services
from utilizing other advisory activities that the department of social and
health services deems necessary for program development.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
4. The department of health
shall return the funds collected by the department in connection with the
power, functions, and duties repealed under section 1 of this act, less actual
program costs, to credentialed adult family home providers and resident
managers registered under chapter 18.48 RCW. The department of health shall
determine the formula for distribution of these funds based upon payment of
registration fees during the previous two renewal periods.

Sec. 5. RCW 18.130.040 and 2001
c 251 s 27 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) This chapter
applies only to the secretary and the boards and commissions having
jurisdiction in relation to the professions licensed under the chapters
specified in this section. This chapter does not apply to any business or
profession not licensed under the chapters specified in this section.

(2)(a) The secretary
has authority under this chapter in relation to the following professions:

(i) Dispensing
opticians licensed under chapter 18.34 RCW;

(ii) Naturopaths
licensed under chapter 18.36A RCW;

(iii) Midwives licensed
under chapter 18.50 RCW;

(iv) Ocularists
licensed under chapter 18.55 RCW;

(v) Massage operators
and businesses licensed under chapter 18.108 RCW;

(vi) Dental hygienists
licensed under chapter 18.29 RCW;

(vii) Acupuncturists licensed
under chapter 18.06 RCW;

(viii) Radiologic
technologists certified and X-ray technicians registered under chapter 18.84
RCW;

(ix) Respiratory care
practitioners licensed under chapter 18.89 RCW;

(x) Persons registered
under chapter 18.19 RCW;

(xi) Persons licensed
as mental health counselors, marriage and family therapists, and social workers
under chapter 18.225 RCW;

(xii) Persons
registered as nursing pool operators under chapter 18.52C RCW;

(xiii) Nursing
assistants registered or certified under chapter 18.88A RCW;

(xiv) Health care
assistants certified under chapter 18.135 RCW;

(xv) Dietitians and
nutritionists certified under chapter 18.138 RCW;

(xvi) Chemical
dependency professionals certified under chapter 18.205 RCW;

(xvii) Sex offender
treatment providers certified under chapter 18.155 RCW;

(xviii) Persons
licensed and certified under chapter 18.73 RCW or RCW 18.71.205;

(xix) ((Persons
registered as adult family home providers and resident managers under RCW
18.48.020;

(xx))) Denturists licensed under chapter 18.30 RCW;

(((xxi))) (xx)
Orthotists and prosthetists licensed under chapter 18.200 RCW; and

(((xxii))) (xxi)
Surgical technologists registered under chapter 18.215 RCW.

(b) The boards and
commissions having authority under this chapter are as follows:

(i) The podiatric
medical board as established in chapter 18.22 RCW;

(ii) The chiropractic
quality assurance commission as established in chapter 18.25 RCW;

(iii) The dental
quality assurance commission as established in chapter 18.32 RCW;

(iv) The board of
hearing and speech as established in chapter 18.35 RCW;

(v) The board of
examiners for nursing home administrators as established in chapter 18.52 RCW;

(vi) The optometry
board as established in chapter 18.54 RCW governing licenses issued under
chapter 18.53 RCW;

(vii) The board of
osteopathic medicine and surgery as established in chapter 18.57 RCW governing
licenses issued under chapters 18.57 and 18.57A RCW;

(viii) The board of
pharmacy as established in chapter 18.64 RCW governing licenses issued under
chapters 18.64 and 18.64A RCW;

(ix) The medical
quality assurance commission as established in chapter 18.71 RCW governing
licenses and registrations issued under chapters 18.71 and 18.71A RCW;

(x) The board of
physical therapy as established in chapter 18.74 RCW;

(xi) The board of
occupational therapy practice as established in chapter 18.59 RCW;

(xii) The nursing care
quality assurance commission as established in chapter 18.79 RCW governing
licenses issued under that chapter;

(xiii) The examining
board of psychology and its disciplinary committee as established in chapter
18.83 RCW; and

(xiv) The veterinary
board of governors as established in chapter 18.92 RCW.

(3) In addition to the
authority to discipline license holders, the disciplining authority has the
authority to grant or deny licenses based on the conditions and criteria
established in this chapter and the chapters specified in subsection (2) of
this section. This chapter also governs any investigation, hearing, or
proceeding relating to denial of licensure or issuance of a license
conditioned on the applicant's compliance with an order entered pursuant to RCW
18.130.160 by the disciplining authority.

(4) All disciplining
authorities shall adopt procedures to ensure substantially consistent
application of this chapter, the Uniform Disciplinary Act, among the
disciplining authorities listed in subsection (2) of this section.

Sec. 6. RCW 70.128.120 and 2001
c 319 s 8 are each amended to read as follows:

Each adult family home
provider and each resident manager shall have the following minimum
qualifications:

(1) Twenty-one years of
age or older;

(2) For those applying
after September 1, 2001, to be licensed as providers, and for resident managers
whose employment begins after September 1, 2001, a high school diploma or
general educational development (GED) certificate;

(3) Good moral and
responsible character and reputation;

(4) Literacy in the
English language, however, a person not literate in the English language may
meet the requirements of this subsection by assuring that there is a person on
staff and available who is able to communicate or make provisions for
communicating with the resident in his or her primary language and capable of
understanding and speaking English well enough to be able to respond
appropriately to emergency situations and be able to read and understand
resident care plans;

(5) Management and
administrative ability to carry out the requirements of this chapter;

(6) Satisfactory
completion of department-approved basic training and continuing education
training as specified by the department in rule, based on recommendations of
the community long-term care training and education steering committee and
working in collaboration with providers, consumers, caregivers, advocates,
family members, educators, and other interested parties in the rule-making
process;

(7) Satisfactory completion
of department-approved, or equivalent, special care training before a provider
may provide special care services to a resident;

(8) Not been convicted
of any crime listed in RCW 43.43.830 and 43.43.842; and

(9) ((Registered
with the department of health; and

(10))) For those applying after September 1, 2001, to
be licensed as providers, and for resident managers whose employment begins
after September 1, 2001, at least three hundred twenty hours of successful,
direct caregiving experience obtained after age eighteen to vulnerable adults
in a licensed or contracted setting prior to operating or managing an adult
family home.

---
END ---