BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF
WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1. RCW 36.75.035 and 1985 c
400 s 1 are each amended to read as follows:

A county
pursuant to chapter 36.88 RCW, or a service district as provided for in chapter
36.83 RCW, may, with the approval of the state department of transportation,
improve or fund the improvement of any state highway within its boundaries.
The county may fund improvements under this section by any means authorized by
law((, but may not make any expenditure for the purposes of this section
from a county road fund under chapter 36.82 RCW)). Nothing in this section
shall limit the authority of a county to fund cooperative improvement and
maintenance agreements with the department of transportation, authorized by RCW
36.75.030 or 47.28.140.

--- END ---