BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF
WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1. RCW 38.52.010 and 1997 c
49 s 1 are each amended to read as follows:

As used in this
chapter:

(1) "Emergency
management" or "comprehensive emergency management" means the
preparation for and the carrying out of all emergency functions, other than
functions for which the military forces are primarily responsible, to mitigate,
prepare for, respond to, and recover from emergencies and disasters, and to aid
victims suffering from injury or damage, resulting from disasters caused by all
hazards, whether natural, technological, or human caused, and to provide
support for search and rescue operations for persons and property in distress.
((However, "emergency management" or "comprehensive emergency
management" does not mean preparation for emergency evacuation or
relocation of residents in anticipation of nuclear attack.))

(2) "Local
organization for emergency services or management" means an organization
created in accordance with the provisions of this chapter by state or local
authority to perform local emergency management functions.

(3) "Political
subdivision" means any county, city or town.

(4) "Emergency
worker" means any person, including but not limited to an architect
registered under chapter 18.08 RCW or a professional engineer registered under
chapter 18.43 RCW, who is registered with a local emergency management
organization or the department and holds an identification card issued by the
local emergency management director or the department for the purpose of
engaging in authorized emergency management activities ((or)), is
an employee of the state of Washington or any political subdivision thereof,
or any person impressed into service in accordance with RCW 38.52.110, who
is called upon to perform emergency management activities.

(5) "Injury"
as used in this chapter shall mean and include accidental injuries and/or
occupational diseases arising out of emergency management activities,
including any injuries or diseases arising out of emergency management
activities resulting from destructive operations or attacks by enemies of the
United States.

(6)(a) "Emergency
or disaster" as used in all sections of this chapter except RCW 38.52.430
shall mean an event or set of circumstances, including destructive operations
or attacks by enemies of the United States, which: (I) Demands immediate
action to preserve public health, protect life, protect public property, or to
provide relief to any stricken community overtaken by such occurrences, or (ii)
reaches such a dimension or degree of destructiveness as to warrant the
governor declaring a state of emergency pursuant to RCW 43.06.010.

(b)
"Emergency" as used in RCW 38.52.430 means an incident that requires
a normal police, coroner, fire, rescue, emergency medical services, or utility
response as a result of a violation of one of the statutes enumerated in RCW
38.52.430.

(7) "Search and
rescue" means the acts of searching for, rescuing, or recovering by means
of ground, marine, or air activity any person who becomes lost, injured, or is
killed ((while outdoors or)) as a result of a natural, technological, or
human caused emergency or disaster, or as a result of destructive
operations or attacks by enemies of the United States, including instances
involving searches for downed aircraft when ground personnel are used. Nothing
in this section shall affect appropriate activity by the department of
transportation under chapter 47.68 RCW.

(8) "Executive
head" and "executive heads" means the county executive in those
charter counties with an elective office of county executive, however
designated, and, in the case of other counties, the county legislative
authority. In the case of cities and towns, it means the mayor in those cities
and towns with mayor-council or commission forms of government, where the mayor
is directly elected, and it means the city manager in those cities and towns
with council manager forms of government. Cities and towns may also designate
an executive head for the purposes of this chapter by ordinance.

(9)
"Director" means the adjutant general.

(10) "Local
director" means the director of a local organization of emergency
management or emergency services.

(11)
"Department" means the state military department.

(12) "Emergency
response" as used in RCW 38.52.430 means a public agency's use of
emergency services during an emergency or disaster as defined in subsection
(6)(b) of this section.

(13) "Expense of
an emergency response" as used in RCW 38.52.430 means reasonable costs
incurred by a public agency in reasonably making an appropriate emergency
response to the incident, but shall only include those costs directly arising
from the response to the particular incident. Reasonable costs shall include
the costs of providing police, coroner, fire fighting, rescue, emergency
medical services, or utility response at the scene of the incident, as well as
the salaries of the personnel responding to the incident.

(14) "Public
agency" means the state, and a city, county, municipal corporation,
district, town, or public authority located, in whole or in part, within this
state which provides or may provide fire fighting, police, ambulance, medical,
or other emergency services.

(15) "Incident
command system" means: (a) An all-hazards, on-scene functional management
system that establishes common standards in organization, terminology, and
procedures; provides a means (unified command) for the establishment of a
common set of incident objectives and strategies during
multiagency/multijurisdiction operations while maintaining individual
agency/jurisdiction authority, responsibility, and accountability; and is a
component of the national interagency incident management system; or (b) an
equivalent and compatible all-hazards, on-scene functional management system.

Sec. 2. RCW 38.52.030 and 1997 c
49 s 2 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) The director may
employ such personnel and may make such expenditures within the appropriation
therefor, or from other funds made available for purposes of emergency
management, as may be necessary to carry out the purposes of this chapter.

(2) The director,
subject to the direction and control of the governor, shall be responsible to
the governor for carrying out the program for emergency management of this
state. The director shall coordinate the activities of all organizations for
emergency management within the state, and shall maintain liaison with and
cooperate with emergency management agencies and organizations of other states
and of the federal government, and shall have such additional authority,
duties, and responsibilities authorized by this chapter, as may be prescribed
by the governor.

(3) The director shall
develop and maintain a comprehensive, all-hazard emergency plan for the state
which shall include an analysis of the natural, technological, or human caused
hazards, to include possible conventional, chemical, biological, and
radiological destructive operations or attacks by enemies of the United States,
which could affect the state of Washington, and shall include the procedures to
be used during emergencies for coordinating local resources, as necessary, and
the resources of all state agencies, departments, commissions, and boards. The
comprehensive emergency management plan shall direct the department in times of
state emergency to administer and manage the state's emergency operations
center. This will include representation from all appropriate state agencies
and be available as a single point of contact for the authorizing of state
resources or actions, including emergency permits. The comprehensive emergency
management plan must specify the use of the incident command system for
multiagency/multijurisdiction operations. ((The comprehensive, all-hazard
emergency plan authorized under this subsection may not include preparation for
emergency evacuation or relocation of residents in anticipation of nuclear
attack.)) This plan shall be known as the comprehensive emergency
management plan.

(4) In accordance with
the comprehensive emergency management plans and the programs for the emergency
management of this state, the director shall procure supplies and equipment, institute
training programs and public information programs, and shall take all other
preparatory steps, including the partial or full mobilization of emergency
management organizations in advance of actual disaster, to insure the
furnishing of adequately trained and equipped forces of emergency management
personnel in time of need.

(5) The director shall
make such studies and surveys of the industries, resources, and facilities in
this state, including federal facilities as provided for in RCW 38.52.170,
as may be necessary to ascertain the capabilities of the state for emergency
management, and shall plan for the most efficient emergency use thereof.

(6) The emergency
management council shall advise the director on all aspects of the
communications and warning systems and facilities operated or controlled under
the provisions of this chapter.

(7) The director,
through the state enhanced 911 coordinator, shall coordinate and facilitate
implementation and operation of a state-wide enhanced 911 emergency communications
network.

(8) The director shall
appoint a state coordinator of search and rescue operations to coordinate those
state resources, services and facilities (other than those for which the state
director of aeronautics is directly responsible) requested by political
subdivisions in support of search and rescue operations, and on request to
maintain liaison with and coordinate the resources, services, and facilities of
political subdivisions when more than one political subdivision is engaged in joint
search and rescue operations.

(9) The director,
subject to the direction and control of the governor, shall prepare and
administer a state program for emergency assistance to individuals within the
state who are victims of a natural, technological, or human caused disaster, or
destructive operations or attacks by enemies of the United States, as
defined by RCW 38.52.010(6). Such program may be integrated into and
coordinated with disaster assistance plans and programs of the federal
government which provide to the state, or through the state to any political
subdivision thereof, services, equipment, supplies, materials, or funds by way
of gift, grant, or loan for purposes of assistance to individuals affected by a
disaster. Further, such program may include, but shall not be limited to,
grants, loans, or gifts of services, equipment, supplies, materials, or funds
of the state, or any political subdivision thereof, to individuals who, as a
result of a disaster, are in need of assistance and who meet standards of
eligibility for disaster assistance established by the department of social and
health services: PROVIDED, HOWEVER, That nothing herein shall be construed in
any manner inconsistent with the provisions of Article VIII, section 5 or
section 7 of the Washington state Constitution.

(10) The director shall
appoint a state coordinator for radioactive and hazardous waste and
chemical, biological, and radiological emergency response programs. The
coordinator shall consult with the state radiation control officer in matters
relating to radioactive ((materials)) substances. The duties of
the state coordinator for radioactive and hazardous waste and chemical,
biological, and radiological emergency response programs shall include:

(a) Assessing the current
needs and capabilities of state and local radioactive and hazardous waste and
chemical, biological, and radiological emergency response teams on an
ongoing basis;

(b) Coordinating
training programs for state and local officials for the purpose of updating
skills relating to emergency mitigation, preparedness, response, and recovery;

(c) Utilizing
appropriate training programs such as those offered by the federal emergency
management agency, the department of transportation, department of defense,
and the environmental protection agency; and

(d) Undertaking other
duties in this area that are deemed appropriate by the director.

Sec. 3. RCW 38.52.040 and 1995 c
269 s 1202 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) There is hereby
created the emergency management council (hereinafter called the council), to
consist of not more than seventeen members who shall be appointed by the
governor. The membership of the council shall include, but not be limited to,
representatives of city and county governments, sheriffs and police chiefs, the
Washington state patrol, the military department, the department of ecology,
state and local fire chiefs, seismic safety experts, state and local emergency
management directors, search and rescue volunteers, medical professions who
have expertise in emergency medical care, building officials, and private
industry. The representatives of private industry shall include persons
knowledgeable in emergency and hazardous materials management, to include
chemical, biological, and radiological substances. The council members
shall elect a chairman from within the council membership. The members of the
council shall serve without compensation, but may be reimbursed for their
travel expenses incurred in the performance of their duties in accordance with
RCW 43.03.050 and 43.03.060 as now existing or hereafter amended.

(2) The emergency
management council shall advise the governor and the director on all matters
pertaining to state and local emergency management. The council may appoint
such ad hoc committees, subcommittees, and working groups as are required to
develop specific recommendations for the improvement of emergency management
practices, standards, policies, or procedures. The council shall ensure that
the governor receives an annual assessment of state-wide emergency preparedness
including, but not limited to, specific progress on hazard mitigation and
reduction efforts, implementation of seismic safety improvements, reduction of
flood hazards, contingency planning for destructive operations or attacks by
enemies of the United States involving chemical, biological, or radiological
weapons, and coordination of hazardous materials planning and response
activities. The council shall review administrative rules governing state
and local emergency management practices and recommend necessary revisions to
the director.

(3) The council
or a subcommittee thereof shall periodically convene in special session and
serve during those sessions as the state emergency response commission required
by P.L. 99-499, the emergency planning and community right-to-know act. When
sitting in session as the state emergency response commission, the council
shall confine its deliberations to those items specified in federal statutes
and state administrative rules governing the coordination of hazardous
materials policy. ((The council shall review administrative rules governing
state and local emergency management practices and recommend necessary
revisions to the director.))

Sec. 4. RCW 38.52.070 and 1997 c
49 s 4 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) Each political
subdivision of this state is hereby authorized and directed to establish a
local organization or to be a member of a joint local organization for
emergency management in accordance with the state comprehensive emergency
management plan and program: PROVIDED, That a political subdivision proposing
such establishment shall submit its plan and program for emergency management
to the state director and secure his or her recommendations thereon, and
verification of consistency with the state comprehensive emergency management
plan, in order that the plan of the local organization for emergency management
may be coordinated with the plan and program of the state. Local comprehensive
emergency management plans must specify the use of the incident command system
for multiagency/multijurisdiction operations. ((No political subdivision
may be required to include in its plan provisions for the emergency evacuation
or relocation of residents in anticipation of nuclear attack.)) If the
director's recommendations are adverse to the plan as submitted, and, if the
local organization does not agree to the director's recommendations for
modification to the proposal, the matter shall be referred to the council for
final action. The director may authorize two or more political subdivisions to
join in the establishment and operation of a joint local organization for
emergency management as circumstances may warrant, in which case each political
subdivision shall contribute to the cost of emergency management upon such fair
and equitable basis as may be determined upon by the executive heads of the
constituent subdivisions. If in any case the executive heads cannot agree upon
the proper division of cost the matter shall be referred to the council for
arbitration and its decision shall be final. When two or more political
subdivisions join in the establishment and operation of a joint local
organization for emergency management each shall pay its share of the cost into
a special pooled fund to be administered by the treasurer of the most populous
subdivision, which fund shall be known as the
. . . . . . emergency management fund. Each local
organization or joint local organization for emergency management shall have a
director who shall be appointed by the executive head of the political
subdivision, and who shall have direct responsibility for the organization,
administration, and operation of such local organization for emergency
management, subject to the direction and control of such executive officer or officers.
In the case of a joint local organization for emergency management, the
director shall be appointed by the joint action of the executive heads of the
constituent political subdivisions. Each local organization or joint local
organization for emergency management shall perform emergency management
functions within the territorial limits of the political subdivision within
which it is organized, and, in addition, shall conduct such functions outside
of such territorial limits as may be required pursuant to the provisions of
this chapter.

(2) In carrying out the
provisions of this chapter each political subdivision, in which any disaster as
described in RCW 38.52.020 occurs, shall have the power to enter into contracts
and incur obligations necessary to combat such disaster, protecting the health
and safety of persons and property, and providing emergency assistance to the
victims of such disaster. Each political subdivision is authorized to exercise
the powers vested under this section in the light of the exigencies of an
extreme emergency situation without regard to time-consuming procedures and
formalities prescribed by law (excepting mandatory constitutional
requirements), including, but not limited to, budget law limitations,
requirements of competitive bidding and publication of notices, provisions
pertaining to the performance of public work, entering into contracts, the
incurring of obligations, the employment of temporary workers, the rental of
equipment, the purchase of supplies and materials, the levying of taxes, and
the appropriation and expenditures of public funds.

Sec. 5. RCW 38.52.080 and 1984 c
38 s 8 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) Whenever the
employees of any political subdivision are rendering outside aid pursuant to
the authority contained in RCW 38.52.070 such employees shall have the same
powers, duties, rights, privileges, and immunities as if they were performing
their duties in the political subdivisions in which they are normally employed.

(2) The political
subdivision in which any equipment is used pursuant to this section shall be
liable for any loss or damage thereto and shall pay any expense incurred in the
operation and maintenance thereof. No claim for such loss, damage, or expense
shall be allowed unless, within sixty days after the same is sustained or
incurred, an itemized notice of such claim under oath is served by mail or
otherwise upon the executive head of such political subdivision where the
equipment was used. The term "employee" as used in this section
shall mean, and the provisions of this section shall apply with equal effect
to, volunteer auxiliary employees, impressed persons as defined in RCW
38.52.110, and emergency workers.

(3) The foregoing
rights, privileges, and obligations shall also apply in the event such aid is
rendered outside the state, provided that payment or reimbursement in such case
shall or may be made by the state or political subdivision receiving such aid
pursuant to a reciprocal mutual aid agreement or compact with such state or by
the federal government.

Sec. 6. RCW 38.52.170 and 1986 c
266 s 30 are each amended to read as follows:

Whenever the director
finds that it will be in the interest of the emergency management of this state
or of the United States, the director may, with the approval of the governor,
agree with the federal government, or any agency thereof carrying on activities
within this state, upon a plan of emergency management applicable to a federally
owned area, which plan may or may not conform to all of the other provisions of
this chapter with the view to integrating federally owned areas into the
comprehensive plan and program of the emergency management of this state. Such
plan may confer upon persons carrying out such plan any or all of the rights,
powers, privileges and immunities granted employees or representatives of the
state and/or its political subdivisions by this chapter. ((The plan of
emergency management authorized under this section may not include preparation
for emergency evacuation or relocation of residents in anticipation of nuclear
attack.))

Sec. 7. RCW 38.52.180 and 1987 c
185 s 7 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) There shall be no
liability on the part of anyone including any person, partnership, corporation,
the state of Washington or any political subdivision thereof who owns or
maintains any building or premises which have been designated by a local
organization for emergency management as a shelter from destructive operations
or attacks by enemies of the United States for any injuries sustained by any
person while in or upon said building or premises, as a result of the condition
of said building or premises or as a result of any act or omission, or in any
way arising from the designation of such premises as a shelter, when such
person has entered or gone upon or into said building or premises for the
purpose of seeking refuge therein during destructive operations or attacks by
enemies of the United States or during tests ordered by lawful authority,
except for an act of wilful negligence by such owner or occupant or his
servants, agents, or employees.

(2) All legal liability
for damage to property or injury or death to persons (except an emergency
worker((, regularly enrolled and acting as such)) as defined in RCW
38.52.010(4)), caused by acts done, or attempted, under the color of this
chapter in a bona fide attempt to comply therewith shall be the obligation of
the state of Washington. Suits may be instituted and maintained against the
state for the enforcement of such liability, or for the indemnification of
persons appointed ((and)), regularly enrolled, or working
as emergency workers while actually engaged in emergency management duties, or
as members of any agency of the state or political subdivision thereof engaged
in emergency management activity, or their dependents, for damage done to their
private property, or for any judgment against them for acts done in good faith
in compliance with this chapter: PROVIDED, That the foregoing shall not be
construed to result in indemnification in any case of wilful misconduct, gross
negligence or bad faith on the part of any agent of emergency management:
PROVIDED, That should the United States or any agency thereof, in accordance
with any federal statute, rule or regulation, provide for the payment of
damages to property and/or for death or injury as provided for in this section,
then and in that event there shall be no liability or obligation whatsoever
upon the part of the state of Washington for any such damage, death, or injury
for which the United States government assumes liability.

(3) Any requirement for
a license to practice any professional, mechanical or other skill shall not apply
to any authorized emergency worker who shall, in the course of performing his
duties as such, practice such professional, mechanical or other skill during an
emergency described in this chapter.

(4) The
provisions of this section shall not affect the right of any person to receive
benefits to which he would otherwise be entitled under this chapter, or under
the workers' compensation law, or under any pension or retirement law, nor the
right of any such person to receive any benefits or compensation under any act
of congress.

---
END ---