BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF
WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec.
1. A new section is added
to chapter 42.17 RCW to read as follows:

It is the intent of the
legislature to increase the authority of the public disclosure commission and
the courts to more effectively foster compliance with our state's requirements
regarding campaign finance and contribution limits, lobbying, political
advertising, and reporting of public officials' financial affairs. It is the
intent of the legislature to make the agency's penalty authority for violations
of the campaign, lobbying, political advertising, and public officials'
financial affairs provisions in RCW 42.17.010 through 42.17.245 and 42.17.350
through 42.17.790 more consistent with other agencies that enforce state ethics
laws.

Sec. 2. RCW 42.17.390 and 1993 c
2 s 28 are each amended to read as follows:

One or more of the
following civil remedies and sanctions may be imposed by court order in
addition to any other remedies provided by law:

(1) If the court finds
that the violation of any provision of this chapter by any candidate or
political committee probably affected the outcome of any election, the result
of said election may be held void and a special election held within sixty days
of such finding. Any action to void an election shall be commenced within one
year of the date of the election in question. It is intended that this remedy
be imposed freely in all appropriate cases to protect the right of the
electorate to an informed and knowledgeable vote.

(2) If any lobbyist or
sponsor of any grass roots lobbying campaign violates any of the provisions of
this chapter, his or her registration may be revoked or suspended and he
or she may be enjoined from receiving compensation or making expenditures
for lobbying: PROVIDED, HOWEVER, That imposition of such sanction shall not
excuse said lobbyist from filing statements and reports required by this
chapter.

(3) Any person who
violates any of the provisions of ((this chapter)) RCW 42.17.010
through 42.17.245 and 42.17.350 through 42.17.790 may be subject to a civil
penalty of not more than ten thousand dollars for each such violation.
However, a person or entity who violates RCW 42.17.640 may be ordered to
return a contribution illegally accepted and may be subject to a civil
penalty of ten thousand dollars or three times the amount of the contribution
illegally made or accepted, whichever is greater.

(4) Any person who
fails to file a properly completed statement or report within the time required
by this chapter may be subject to a civil penalty of ten dollars per day for
each day each such delinquency continues.

(5) Any person who
fails to report a contribution or expenditure as required by this chapter
may be subject to a civil penalty equivalent to the amount ((he failed to
report)) not reported as required.

(6) Any person found
to have violated RCW 42.17.130 may be ordered to pay restitution in addition to
paying any penalties imposed.

(7) Any person found
to have violated RCW 42.17.130 may be ordered to pay any civil penalty and any
restitution with funds that are not public funds as defined in RCW 43.88.020 or
as derived through taxes, fees, penalties, or other similar sources.

(8) Any person
subject to RCW 42.17.010 through 42.17.245 or 42.17.350 through 42.17.790 may
be ordered to take all actions necessary to comply with those sections and
Title 390 WAC, including but not limited to the returning of contributions made
or received in violation of RCW 42.17.105(8) or 42.17.640.

(9) The court
may enjoin any person to prevent the doing of any act herein prohibited, or to
compel the performance of any act required herein.

Sec. 3. RCW 42.17.395 and 1989 c
175 s 91 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) The commission may
(a) determine whether an actual violation of ((this chapter)) RCW
42.17.010 through 42.17.245 or 42.17.350 through 42.17.790 has occurred;
and (b) issue and enforce an appropriate order following such determination.

(2) The commission, in
cases where it chooses to determine whether an actual violation ((of this
chapter)) has occurred, shall hold a hearing pursuant to the Administrative
Procedure Act, chapter 34.05 RCW, to make such determination. Any order that
the commission issues under this section shall be pursuant to such hearing.

(3) In lieu of holding
a hearing or issuing an order under this section, the commission may refer the
matter to the attorney general or other enforcement agency as provided in RCW
42.17.360.

(4) The person against whom
an order is directed under this section shall be designated as the respondent.
The order may require the respondent to cease and desist from the activity that
constitutes a violation and in addition, or alternatively, may impose one or
more of the remedies provided in RCW 42.17.390(((1) (b), (c), (d), or (e)))
(2) through (8): PROVIDED, That no individual penalty assessed by the
commission may exceed ((one)) four thousand dollars, and in any
case where multiple violations are involved in a single complaint or hearing,
the maximum aggregate penalty may not exceed ((two)) ten thousand
((five hundred)) dollars.

(5) An order issued by
the commission under this section shall be subject to judicial review under the
Administrative Procedure Act, chapter 34.05 RCW. If the commission's order is
not satisfied and no petition for review is filed within thirty days as
provided in RCW 34.05.542, the commission may petition a court of competent
jurisdiction of any county in which a petition for review could be filed under
that section, for an order of enforcement. Proceedings in connection with the
commission's petition shall be in accordance with RCW 42.17.397.

Sec. 4. RCW 42.17.400 and 1975
1st ex.s. c 294 s 27 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) The attorney
general and the prosecuting authorities of political subdivisions of this state
may bring civil actions in the name of the state for any appropriate civil
remedy, including but not limited to the special remedies provided in RCW
42.17.390.

(2) The attorney
general and the prosecuting authorities of political subdivisions of this state
may investigate or cause to be investigated the activities of any person who
there is reason to believe is or has been acting in violation of this chapter,
and may require any such person or any other person reasonably believed to have
information concerning the activities of such person to appear at a time and
place designated in the county in which such person resides or is found, to
give such information under oath and to produce all accounts, bills, receipts,
books, paper and documents which may be relevant or material to any
investigation authorized under this chapter.

(3) When the attorney
general or the prosecuting authority of any political subdivision of this state
requires the attendance of any person to obtain such information or the
production of the accounts, bills, receipts, books, papers, and documents which
may be relevant or material to any investigation authorized under this chapter,
he shall issue an order setting forth the time when and the place where
attendance is required and shall cause the same to be delivered to or sent by registered
mail to the person at least fourteen days before the date fixed for
attendance. Such order shall have the same force and effect as a subpoena,
shall be effective statewide, and, upon application of the attorney general or
said prosecuting authority, obedience to the order may be enforced by any
superior court judge in the county where the person receiving it resides or is
found, in the same manner as though the order were a subpoena. The court,
after hearing, for good cause, and upon application of any person aggrieved by
the order, shall have the right to alter, amend, revise, suspend, or postpone
all or any part of its provisions. In any case where the order is not enforced
by the court according to its terms, the reasons for the court's actions shall
be clearly stated in writing, and such action shall be subject to review by the
appellate courts by certiorari or other appropriate proceeding.

(4) Any person who has
notified the public disclosure commission, the attorney general,
and the prosecuting attorney in the county in which the violation occurred in
writing that there is reason to believe that some provision of this chapter is
being or has been violated may himself bring in the name of the state any of
the actions (hereinafter referred to as a citizen's action) authorized under
this chapter. This citizen action may be brought only if the attorney general
and the prosecuting attorney have failed to commence an action hereunder within
((forty-five)) sixty business days after such notice and such
person has thereafter further notified the attorney general and prosecuting
attorney that ((said)) the person will commence a citizen's
action within ten business days upon their failure so to do, and the
attorney general and the prosecuting attorney have in fact failed to bring such
action within ten business days of receipt of ((said)) the
second notice. If the person who brings the citizen's action prevails, the
judgment awarded shall escheat to the state, but he shall be entitled to be
reimbursed by the state of Washington for costs and attorney's fees he has
incurred: PROVIDED, That in the case of a citizen's action which is dismissed
and which the court also finds was brought without reasonable cause, the court
may order the person commencing the action to pay all costs of trial and
reasonable attorney's fees incurred by the defendant.

(5) In any action
brought under this section, the court may award to the state all costs of
investigation and trial, including a reasonable attorney's fee to be fixed by
the court. If the violation is found to have been intentional, the amount of
the judgment, which shall for this purpose include the costs, may be trebled as
punitive damages. If damages or trebled damages are awarded in such an action
brought against a lobbyist, the judgment may be awarded against the lobbyist,
and the lobbyist's employer or employers joined as defendants, jointly,
severally, or both. If the defendant prevails, he shall be awarded all costs
of trial, and may be awarded a reasonable attorney's fee to be fixed by the
court to be paid by the state of Washington.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 5. If any provision of this
act or its application to any person or circumstance is held invalid, the
remainder of the act or the application of the provision to other persons or
circumstances is not affected.

---
END ---