BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF
WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec.
1. The legislature affirms
that parents have a paramount right to raise their minor children. The
legislature also recognizes that the paramount right must be considered in
conjunction with a minor child's interest in maintaining significant
relationships with nonparents. Therefore, the legislature intends to establish
internally consistent and rigorous standards that must be met for a nonparent
to obtain visitation with a minor child.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
2. A new section is added
to chapter 26.10 RCW to read as follows:

(1) A person who is not
a parent of the child may petition the court for visitation with the child if
the petitioner can demonstrate by a preponderance of the evidence that:

(a) There is a
substantial and beneficial relationship between the petitioner and the child;

(b) The petitioner has
been unreasonably denied visitation with the child by a parent, custodian, or
other person with primary decision-making authority over the child; and

(c) There has been a
significant change in circumstances with either the child, the petitioner, or
the parent, custodian, or other person having primary decision-making authority
over the child that substantially threatens the relationship between the child
and the petitioner. The change in circumstances could include, but is not
limited to, a dissolution, legal separation, informal physical separation,
death of a parent, or other significant change in the family structure.

(2)(a) If the court
dismisses a petition for visitation brought under this section because the
petitioner failed to demonstrate the requirements in subsection (1) of this
section, the court may order the petitioner to pay reasonable attorneys' fees
and costs to the party responding to the petition. Nothing in this subsection
precludes a court from ordering attorneys' fees and costs under RCW 26.10.080.

(b) Petitions that are
not dismissed by the court must be submitted to mediation or other alternative
dispute resolution before proceeding to trial. Upon petition of any party that
mediation or other alternative dispute resolution is not appropriate or
available, the court may order or the mediator or alternative dispute
resolution facilitator may determine that the case is not appropriate for
mediation or other alternative dispute resolution. Mediation or other
alternative dispute resolution shall be pursuant to procedures established by
local or state court rules for family law cases.

(3)(a) Except as
provided in (b) of this subsection, a petition for visitation brought under
this section must be filed in the county in which the child resides.

(b) If a dissolution,
legal separation, modification of parenting plan, or other custody proceeding
is pending involving the child, the petition for visitation under this section
shall be filed in the county in which the proceeding is pending.

(c) Visitation granted
pursuant to this section shall be incorporated into the parenting plan for the
child.

(4) The court may order
visitation between the petitioner and the child if the petitioner shows and the
court finds by a preponderance of the evidence that visitation is in the
child's best interest and:

(a) Denial of
court-ordered visitation would result in a likelihood of substantial harm to
the child's physical, psychological, or emotional well-being;

(b) The likelihood of
harm is beyond the normal short-term distress a child suffers due to a change
in circumstances;

(c) Continuation of the
relationship between the child and the petitioner would likely have substantial
benefits to the child;

(d) Visitation would
not substantially interfere with the relationship between the child and the
parent, custodian, or other person with primary decision-making authority over
the child; and

(e) If there is a
residential schedule for the child, visitation is reasonable based on the
residential time-sharing arrangements between the parents, custodian, or other
person with primary decision-making authority over the child.

(5) In determining the
nature and extent of visitation, the court must consider the wishes of a child
who is sufficiently mature to express reasoned and independent preferences as
to visitation issues.

(6) The restrictions of
RCW 26.10.160 that apply to parents shall apply to the petitioner under this
section.

Sec. 3. RCW 26.09.240 and 1996 c
177 s 1 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) Under section 1
of this act, a person other than a parent may petition the court for
visitation with a child ((at any time)) or may intervene in a pending
dissolution, legal separation, or modification of parenting plan proceeding.
((A person other than a parent may not petition for visitation under this
section unless the child's parent or parents have commenced an action under
this chapter.

(2) A petition for
visitation with a child by a person other than a parent must be filed in the
county in which the child resides.

(3) A petition for
visitation or a motion to intervene pursuant to this section shall be dismissed
unless the petitioner or intervenor can demonstrate by clear and convincing
evidence that a significant relationship exists with the child with whom
visitation is sought. If the petition or motion is dismissed for failure to
establish the existence of a significant relationship, the petitioner or
intervenor shall be ordered to pay reasonable attorney's fees and costs to the
parent, parents, other custodian, or representative of the child who responds
to this petition or motion.

(4) The court may
order visitation between the petitioner or intervenor and the child between
whom a significant relationship exists upon a finding supported by the evidence
that the visitation is in the child's best interests.

(5)(a) Visitation
with a grandparent shall be presumed to be in the child's best interests when a
significant relationship has been shown to exist. This presumption may be
rebutted by a preponderance of evidence showing that visitation would endanger
the child's physical, mental, or emotional health.

(b) If the court
finds that reasonable visitation by a grandparent would be in the child's best
interest except for hostilities that exist between the grandparent and one or
both of the parents or person with whom the child lives, the court may set the
matter for mediation under RCW 26.09.015.

(6) The court may
consider the following factors when making a determination of the child's best
interests:

(a) The strength of
the relationship between the child and the petitioner;

(b) The relationship
between each of the child's parents or the person with whom the child is residing
and the petitioner;

(c) The nature and
reason for either parent's objection to granting the petitioner visitation;

(d) The effect that
granting visitation will have on the relationship between the child and the
child's parents or the person with whom the child is residing;

(e) The residential
time sharing arrangements between the parents;

(f) The good faith
of the petitioner;

(g) Any criminal
history or history of physical, emotional, or sexual abuse or neglect by the
petitioner; and

(h) Any other factor
relevant to the child's best interest.

(7) The restrictions
of RCW 26.09.191 that apply to parents shall be applied to a petitioner or
intervenor who is not a parent. The nature and extent of visitation, subject
to these restrictions, is in the discretion of the court.

(8) The court may
order an investigation and report concerning the proposed visitation or may
appoint a guardian ad litem as provided in RCW 26.09.220.

(9) Visitation
granted pursuant to this section shall be incorporated into the parenting plan
for the child.

(10) The court may
modify or terminate visitation rights granted pursuant to this section in any
subsequent modification action upon a showing that the visitation is no longer
in the best interest of the child.))

Sec. 4. RCW 26.10.160 and 1996 c
303 s 2 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) A parent not
granted custody of the child is entitled to reasonable visitation rights except
as provided in subsection (2) of this section.

(2)(a) Visitation with
the child shall be limited if it is found that the parent seeking visitation
has engaged in any of the following conduct: (i) Willful abandonment that
continues for an extended period of time or substantial refusal to perform
parenting functions; (ii) physical, sexual, or a pattern of emotional abuse of
a child; (iii) a history of acts of domestic violence as defined in RCW
26.50.010(1) or an assault or sexual assault which causes grievous bodily harm
or the fear of such harm; or (iv) the parent has been convicted as an adult of
a sex offense under:

(A) RCW 9A.44.076 if,
because of the difference in age between the offender and the victim, no
rebuttable presumption exists under (d) of this subsection;

(B) RCW 9A.44.079 if,
because of the difference in age between the offender and the victim, no
rebuttable presumption exists under (d) of this subsection;

(C) RCW 9A.44.086 if,
because of the difference in age between the offender and the victim, no
rebuttable presumption exists under (d) of this subsection;

(D) RCW 9A.44.089;

(E) RCW 9A.44.093;

(F) RCW 9A.44.096;

(G) RCW 9A.64.020 (1)
or (2) if, because of the difference in age between the offender and the
victim, no rebuttable presumption exists under (d) of this subsection;

(H) Chapter 9.68A RCW;

(I) Any predecessor or
antecedent statute for the offenses listed in (a)(iv)(A) through (H) of this
subsection;

(J) Any statute from
any other jurisdiction that describes an offense analogous to the offenses
listed in (a)(iv)(A) through (H) of this subsection.

This subsection (2)(a)
shall not apply when (c) or (d) of this subsection applies.

(b) The parent's
visitation with the child shall be limited if it is found that the parent
resides with a person who has engaged in any of the following conduct: (i)
Physical, sexual, or a pattern of emotional abuse of a child; (ii) a history of
acts of domestic violence as defined in RCW 26.50.010(1) or an assault or
sexual assault that causes grievous bodily harm or the fear of such harm; or
(iii) the person has been convicted as an adult or as a juvenile has been
adjudicated of a sex offense under:

(A) RCW 9A.44.076 if,
because of the difference in age between the offender and the victim, no
rebuttable presumption exists under (e) of this subsection;

(B) RCW 9A.44.079 if,
because of the difference in age between the offender and the victim, no
rebuttable presumption exists under (e) of this subsection;

(C) RCW 9A.44.086 if,
because of the difference in age between the offender and the victim, no
rebuttable presumption exists under (e) of this subsection;

(D) RCW 9A.44.089;

(E) RCW 9A.44.093;

(F) RCW 9A.44.096;

(G) RCW 9A.64.020 (1)
or (2) if, because of the difference in age between the offender and the
victim, no rebuttable presumption exists under (e) of this subsection;

(H) Chapter 9.68A RCW;

(I) Any predecessor or
antecedent statute for the offenses listed in (b)(iii)(A) through (H) of this
subsection;

(J) Any statute from
any other jurisdiction that describes an offense analogous to the offenses
listed in (b)(iii)(A) through (H) of this subsection.

This subsection (2)(b)
shall not apply when (c) or (e) of this subsection applies.

(c) If a parent has
been found to be a sexual predator under chapter 71.09 RCW or under an
analogous statute of any other jurisdiction, the court shall restrain the
parent from contact with a child that would otherwise be allowed under this
chapter. If a parent resides with an adult or a juvenile who has been found
to be a sexual predator under chapter 71.09 RCW or under an analogous statute
of any other jurisdiction, the court shall restrain the parent from contact
with the parent's child except contact that occurs outside that person's
presence.

(d) There is a
rebuttable presumption that a parent who has been convicted as an adult of a
sex offense listed in (d)(i) through (ix) of this subsection poses a present
danger to a child. Unless the parent rebuts this presumption, the court shall
restrain the parent from contact with a child that would otherwise be allowed
under this chapter:

(i) RCW 9A.64.020 (1)
or (2), provided that the person convicted was at least five years older than
the other person;

(ii) RCW 9A.44.073;

(iii) RCW 9A.44.076,
provided that the person convicted was at least eight years older than the
victim;

(iv) RCW 9A.44.079,
provided that the person convicted was at least eight years older than the
victim;

(v) RCW 9A.44.083;

(vi) RCW 9A.44.086,
provided that the person convicted was at least eight years older than the
victim;

(vii) RCW 9A.44.100;

(viii) Any predecessor
or antecedent statute for the offenses listed in (d)(i) through (vii) of this
subsection;

(ix) Any statute from
any other jurisdiction that describes an offense analogous to the offenses
listed in (d)(i) through (vii) of this subsection.

(e) There is a
rebuttable presumption that a parent who resides with a person who, as an
adult, has been convicted, or as a juvenile has been adjudicated, of the sex
offenses listed in (e)(i) through (ix) of this subsection places a child at
risk of abuse or harm when that parent exercises visitation in the presence of
the convicted or adjudicated person. Unless the parent rebuts the presumption,
the court shall restrain the parent from contact with the parent's child except
for contact that occurs outside of the convicted or adjudicated person's
presence:

(i) RCW 9A.64.020 (1)
or (2), provided that the person convicted was at least five years older than
the other person;

(ii) RCW 9A.44.073;

(iii) RCW 9A.44.076,
provided that the person convicted was at least eight years older than the
victim;

(iv) RCW 9A.44.079,
provided that the person convicted was at least eight years older than the
victim;

(v) RCW 9A.44.083;

(vi) RCW 9A.44.086,
provided that the person convicted was at least eight years older than the
victim;

(vii) RCW 9A.44.100;

(viii) Any predecessor
or antecedent statute for the offenses listed in (e)(i) through (vii) of this
subsection;

(ix) Any statute from
any other jurisdiction that describes an offense analogous to the offenses
listed in (e)(i) through (vii) of this subsection.

(f) The presumption
established in (d) of this subsection may be rebutted only after a written
finding that:

(i) If the child was
not the victim of the sex offense committed by the parent requesting
visitation, (A) contact between the child and the offending parent is
appropriate and poses minimal risk to the child, and (B) the offending parent
has successfully engaged in treatment for sex offenders or is engaged in and
making progress in such treatment, if any was ordered by a court, and the
treatment provider believes such contact is appropriate and poses minimal risk
to the child; or

(ii) If the child was
the victim of the sex offense committed by the parent requesting visitation,
(A) contact between the child and the offending parent is appropriate and poses
minimal risk to the child, (B) if the child is in or has been in therapy for
victims of sexual abuse, the child's counselor believes such contact between
the child and the offending parent is in the child's best interest, and (C) the
offending parent has successfully engaged in treatment for sex offenders or is
engaged in and making progress in such treatment, if any was ordered by a
court, and the treatment provider believes such contact is appropriate and
poses minimal risk to the child.

(g) The presumption
established in (e) of this subsection may be rebutted only after a written
finding that:

(i) If the child was
not the victim of the sex offense committed by the person who is residing with
the parent requesting visitation, (A) contact between the child and the parent
residing with the convicted or adjudicated person is appropriate and that
parent is able to protect the child in the presence of the convicted or
adjudicated person, and (B) the convicted or adjudicated person has
successfully engaged in treatment for sex offenders or is engaged in and making
progress in such treatment, if any was ordered by a court, and the treatment
provider believes such contact is appropriate and poses minimal risk to the
child; or

(ii) If the child was
the victim of the sex offense committed by the person who is residing with the
parent requesting visitation, (A) contact between the child and the parent in
the presence of the convicted or adjudicated person is appropriate and poses
minimal risk to the child, (B) if the child is in or has been in therapy for
victims of sexual abuse, the child's counselor believes such contact between
the child and the parent residing with the convicted or adjudicated person in
the presence of the convicted or adjudicated person is in the child's best
interest, and (C) the convicted or adjudicated person has successfully engaged
in treatment for sex offenders or is engaged in and making progress in such
treatment, if any was ordered by a court, and the treatment provider believes
contact between the parent and child in the presence of the convicted or
adjudicated person is appropriate and poses minimal risk to the child.

(h) If the court finds
that the parent has met the burden of rebutting the presumption under (f) of
this subsection, the court may allow a parent who has been convicted as an
adult of a sex offense listed in (d)(i) through (ix) of this subsection to have
visitation with the child supervised by a neutral and independent adult and
pursuant to an adequate plan for supervision of such visitation. The court
shall not approve of a supervisor for contact between the child and the parent
unless the court finds, based on the evidence, that the supervisor is willing
and capable of protecting the child from harm. The court shall revoke court
approval of the supervisor upon finding, based on the evidence, that the
supervisor has failed to protect the child or is no longer willing or capable
of protecting the child.

(i) If the court finds
that the parent has met the burden of rebutting the presumption under (g) of
this subsection, the court may allow a parent residing with a person who has
been adjudicated as a juvenile of a sex offense listed in (e)(i) through (ix)
of this subsection to have visitation with the child in the presence of the
person adjudicated as a juvenile, supervised by a neutral and independent adult
and pursuant to an adequate plan for supervision of such visitation. The court
shall not approve of a supervisor for contact between the child and the parent
unless the court finds, based on the evidence, that the supervisor is willing
and capable of protecting the child from harm. The court shall revoke court
approval of the supervisor upon finding, based on the evidence, that the
supervisor has failed to protect the child or is no longer willing or capable
of protecting the child.

(j) If the court finds
that the parent has met the burden of rebutting the presumption under (g) of
this subsection, the court may allow a parent residing with a person who, as an
adult, has been convicted of a sex offense listed in (e)(i) through (ix) of
this subsection to have visitation with the child in the presence of the
convicted person supervised by a neutral and independent adult and pursuant to
an adequate plan for supervision of such visitation. The court shall not
approve of a supervisor for contact between the child and the parent unless the
court finds, based on the evidence, that the supervisor is willing and capable
of protecting the child from harm. The court shall revoke court approval of
the supervisor upon finding, based on the evidence, that the supervisor has
failed to protect the child or is no longer willing or capable of protecting
the child.

(k) A court shall not
order unsupervised contact between the offending parent and a child of the
offending parent who was sexually abused by that parent. A court may order
unsupervised contact between the offending parent and a child who was not
sexually abused by the parent after the presumption under (d) of this
subsection has been rebutted and supervised visitation has occurred for at
least two years with no further arrests or convictions of sex offenses
involving children under chapter 9A.44 RCW, RCW 9A.64.020, or chapter 9.68A RCW
and (i) the sex offense of the offending parent was not committed against a
child of the offending parent, and (ii) the court finds that unsupervised
contact between the child and the offending parent is appropriate and poses
minimal risk to the child, after consideration of the testimony of a
state-certified therapist, mental health counselor, or social worker with
expertise in treating child sexual abuse victims who has supervised at least
one period of visitation between the parent and the child, and after consideration
of evidence of the offending parent's compliance with community supervision
requirements, if any. If the offending parent was not ordered by a court to
participate in treatment for sex offenders, then the parent shall obtain a
psychosexual evaluation conducted by a state-certified sex offender treatment
provider indicating that the offender has the lowest likelihood of risk to
reoffend before the court grants unsupervised contact between the parent and a
child.

(l) A court may order
unsupervised contact between the parent and a child which may occur in the
presence of a juvenile adjudicated of a sex offense listed in (e)(i) through
(ix) of this subsection who resides with the parent after the presumption under
(e) of this subsection has been rebutted and supervised visitation has occurred
for at least two years during which time the adjudicated juvenile has had no
further arrests, adjudications, or convictions of sex offenses involving
children under chapter 9A.44 RCW, RCW 9A.64.020, or chapter 9.68A RCW, and (i)
the court finds that unsupervised contact between the child and the parent that
may occur in the presence of the adjudicated juvenile is appropriate and poses
minimal risk to the child, after consideration of the testimony of a state-certified
therapist, mental health counselor, or social worker with expertise in
treatment of child sexual abuse victims who has supervised at least one period
of visitation between the parent and the child in the presence of the
adjudicated juvenile, and after consideration of evidence of the adjudicated
juvenile's compliance with community supervision or parole requirements, if
any. If the adjudicated juvenile was not ordered by a court to participate in
treatment for sex offenders, then the adjudicated juvenile shall obtain a
psychosexual evaluation conducted by a state-certified sex offender treatment
provider indicating that the adjudicated juvenile has the lowest likelihood of
risk to reoffend before the court grants unsupervised contact between the parent
and a child which may occur in the presence of the adjudicated juvenile who is
residing with the parent.

(m)(i) The limitations
imposed by the court under (a) or (b) of this subsection shall be reasonably
calculated to protect the child from the physical, sexual, or emotional abuse
or harm that could result if the child has contact with the parent requesting
visitation. If the court expressly finds based on the evidence that
limitations on visitation with the child will not adequately protect the child
from the harm or abuse that could result if the child has contact with the
parent requesting visitation, the court shall restrain the person seeking
visitation from all contact with the child.

(ii) The court shall
not enter an order under (a) of this subsection allowing a parent to have
contact with a child if the parent has been found by clear and convincing
evidence in a civil action or by a preponderance of the evidence in a
dependency action to have sexually abused the child, except upon recommendation
by an evaluator or therapist for the child that the child is ready for contact
with the parent and will not be harmed by the contact. The court shall not
enter an order allowing a parent to have contact with the child in the
offender's presence if the parent resides with a person who has been found by
clear and convincing evidence in a civil action or by a preponderance of the
evidence in a dependency action to have sexually abused a child, unless the
court finds that the parent accepts that the person engaged in the harmful
conduct and the parent is willing to and capable of protecting the child from
harm from the person.

(iii) If the court
limits visitation under (a) or (b) of this subsection to require supervised
contact between the child and the parent, the court shall not approve of a
supervisor for contact between a child and a parent who has engaged in
physical, sexual, or a pattern of emotional abuse of the child unless the court
finds based upon the evidence that the supervisor accepts that the harmful
conduct occurred and is willing to and capable of protecting the child from
harm. The court shall revoke court approval of the supervisor upon finding,
based on the evidence, that the supervisor has failed to protect the child or
is no longer willing to or capable of protecting the child.

(n) If the court
expressly finds based on the evidence that contact between the parent and the
child will not cause physical, sexual, or emotional abuse or harm to the child
and that the probability that the parent's or other person's harmful or abusive
conduct will recur is so remote that it would not be in the child's best
interests to apply the limitations of (a), (b), and (m)(i) and (iii) of this
subsection, or if the court expressly finds that the parent's conduct did not
have an impact on the child, then the court need not apply the limitations of
(a), (b), and (m)(i) and (iii) of this subsection. The weight given to the
existence of a protection order issued under chapter 26.50 RCW as to domestic
violence is within the discretion of the court. This subsection shall not
apply when (c), (d), (e), (f), (g), (h), (i), (j), (k), (l), and (m)(ii) of
this subsection apply.

(3) ((Any person may
petition the court for visitation rights at any time including, but not limited
to, custody proceedings. The court may order visitation rights for any person
when visitation may serve the best interest of the child whether or not there
has been any change of circumstances.

(4))) The court may modify an order granting or denying
visitation rights whenever modification would serve the best interests of the
child. Modification of a parent's visitation rights shall be subject to the
requirements of subsection (2) of this section.

(((5))) (4)
For the purposes of this section, a parent's child means that parent's natural
child, adopted child, or stepchild.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 5. This act is necessary for
the immediate preservation of the public peace, health, or safety, or support
of the state government and its existing public institutions, and takes effect
immediately.

---
END ---