BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF
WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec.
1. The legislature finds
that commercial fishing is vitally important not just to the economy of
Washington, but also to the cultural heritage of the maritime communities in
the state. Fisher men and women have a long and proud history in the Pacific
Northwest. State and local governments should seek out ways to enable and
encourage these professionals to share the rewards of their craft with the
nonfishing citizens of and visitors to the state of Washington by encouraging
the exploration and development of new niche markets.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
2. A new section is added
to chapter 77.65 RCW to read as follows:

(1) The department must
establish and administer a direct retail endorsement to serve as a single
license that permits the holder of a Washington finfish or crab commercial
fishing license to clean, dress, and sell his or her catch directly to
consumers at retail, including over the internet. The direct retail
endorsement must be issued as an optional addition to all holders of a finfish
or crab commercial fishing license that the department offers under this
chapter.

(2) The direct retail
endorsement must be offered at the time of application for the qualifying
commercial fishing license. Individuals in possession of a qualifying
commercial fishing license issued under this chapter may add a direct retail
endorsement to their current license at the time they renew their commercial
fishing license. Individuals who do not have a commercial fishing license for
finfish or crab issued under this chapter may not receive a direct retail
endorsement. The costs, conditions, responsibilities, and privileges
associated with the endorsed commercial fishing license is not affected or
altered in any way by the addition of a direct retail endorsement. These costs
include the base cost of the license and any revenue and excise taxes.

(3) An individual need
only add one direct retail endorsement to his or her license portfolio. If a
direct retail endorsement is selected by an individual holding more than one
commercial fishing license issued under this chapter, a single direct retail
endorsement is considered to be added to all qualifying commercial fishing
licenses held by that individual, and is the only license required for the individual
to sell at retail the harvest of finfish or crab permitted by all of the
underlying endorsed licenses. The direct retail endorsement applies only to
the person named on the endorsed license, and may not be used by an alternate
operator named on the endorsed license.

(4) In addition to any
fees charged for the endorsed licenses and harvest documentation as required by
this chapter or the rules of the department, the department may set a
reasonable annual fee not to exceed the administrative costs to the department
for a direct retail endorsement.

(5) The holder of a
direct retail endorsement is responsible for documenting the commercial harvest
of finfish and crab according to the provisions of this chapter, the rules of
the department for a wholesale fish dealer, and the reporting requirements of
the endorsed license. Any salmon caught by the holder of a direct retail
endorsement must be landed in the round and documented on fish tickets, as
provided for by the department, before further processing.

(6) The direct retail
endorsement must be displayed in a readily visible manner by the seller
wherever and whenever a sale to someone other than a licensed wholesale dealer
occurs. For sales occurring in a venue other than in person, such as over the internet,
through a catalog, or on the phone, the direct retail endorsement number of the
seller must be provided to the buyer both at the time of sale and the time of
delivery. All internet sales must be conducted in accordance with federal laws
and regulations.

(7) The direct retail
endorsement is to be held by an individual real person and is not transferrable
or assignable. If the endorsed license is transferred, the direct retail
endorsement immediately becomes void, and the transferor is not eligible for a
full or prorated reimbursement of the annual fee paid for the direct retail
endorsement. Upon becoming void, the holder of a direct retail endorsement
must surrender the physical endorsement to the department.

(8) The holder of a
direct retail endorsement must abide by the provisions of Title 69 RCW as they
apply to the processing and retail sale of seafood. The department must
distribute a pamphlet, provided by the department of agriculture, with the
direct retail endorsement generally describing the labeling requirements set
forth in chapter 69.04 RCW as they apply to seafood.

(9) The holder of a
qualifying commercial fishing license issued under this chapter must either
possess a direct retail endorsement or a wholesale dealer license provided for
in RCW 77.65.280 in order to lawfully sell their catch or harvest in the state
to anyone other than a licensed wholesale dealer.

(10) The direct retail
endorsement entitles the holder to sell wild-caught finfish or crab only at a
temporary food service establishment as that term is defined in RCW 69.06.045.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
3. A new section is added
to chapter 77.65 RCW to read as follows:

(1) Prior to being
issued a direct retail endorsement, an individual must:

(a) Obtain and submit
to the department a signed letter on appropriate letterhead from the health
department of the county in which the individual makes his or her official
residence or where the hailing port for any documented vessel owned by the
individual is located. The local health department generating the letter may
charge a reasonable fee for any necessary inspections. The letter must certify
that the methods used by the individual to transport, store, and display fresh
finfish and crabs meets that county's standards and the statewide standards
adopted by the board of health for food service operations; and

(b) Submit proof to the
department that the individual making the direct retail sales is in possession
of a valid food and beverage service worker's permit, as provided for in
chapter 69.06 RCW.

(2) The requirements of
subsection (1) of this section must be completed each license year before a
renewal direct retail endorsement can be issued.

(3) Any individual
possessing a direct retail endorsement must notify the local health department
of the county in which retail sales are to occur, except for the county that
conducted the initial inspection, forty-eight hours before any transaction and
make his or her facilities available for inspection by a fish and wildlife
officer, the local health department of any county in which he or she sells
finfish or crab, and any designee of the department of health or the department
of agriculture.

(4) Neither the
department or a local health department may be held liable in any judicial
proceeding alleging that consumption of or exposure to seafood sold by the
holder of a direct retail endorsement resulted in a negative health
consequence, as long as the department can show that the individual holding the
direct retail endorsement complied with the requirements of subsection (1) of
this section prior to being issued his or her direct retail license, and
neither the department nor a local health department acted in a reckless
manner. For the purposes of this subsection, the department or a local health
district shall not be deemed to be acting recklessly for not conducting a
permissive inspection.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
4. A new section is added
to chapter 77.65 RCW to read as follows:

(1) The direct retail
endorsement is conditioned upon compliance:

(a) With the
requirements of this chapter as they apply to wholesale fish dealers and to the
rules of the department relating to the payment of fines for violations of rules
for the accounting of the commercial harvest of finfish or crabs; and

(b) With the state
board of health and local rules for food service establishments.

(2) Violations of the
requirements and rules referenced in subsection (1) of this section may result
in the suspension of the direct retail endorsement. The suspended individual
must not be reimbursed for any portion of the suspended endorsement.
Suspension of the direct retail endorsement may not occur unless and until:

(a) The director has
notified by order the holder of the direct retail endorsement when a violation
of subsection (1) of this section has occurred. The notification must specify
the type of violation, the liability to be imposed for damages caused by the
violation, a notice that the amount of liability is due and payable by the
holder of the direct retail endorsement, and an explanation of the options
available to satisfy the liability; and

(b) The holder of the
direct retail endorsement has had at least ninety days after the notification
provided in (a) of this subsection was received to either make full payment for
all liabilities owed or enter into an agreement with the department to pay off
all liabilities within a reasonable time.

(3)(a) If, within
ninety days after receipt of the order provided in subsection (2)(a) of this
section, the amount specified in the order is not paid or the holder of the
direct retail endorsement has not entered into an agreement with the department
to pay off all liabilities, the prosecuting attorney for any county in which
the persons to whom the order is directed do business, or the attorney general
upon request of the department, may bring an action on behalf of the state in
the superior court for Thurston county, or any county in which the persons to
whom the order is directed do business, to seek suspension of the individual's
direct retail endorsement for up to five years.

(b) The department may
temporarily suspend the privileges provided by the direct retail endorsement
for up to one hundred twenty days following the receipt of the order provided
in subsection (2)(a) of this section, unless the holder of the direct retail
endorsement has deposited with the department an acceptable performance bond on
forms prescribed and provided by the department. This performance bond must be
a corporate surety bond executed in favor of the department by a corporation
authorized to do business in the state of Washington under chapter 48.28 RCW
and approved by the department. The bond must be filed and maintained in an
amount equal to one thousand dollars.

(4) For violations of
state board of health and local rules under subsection (1)(b) of this section
only, any person inspecting the facilities of a direct retail endorsement
holder under section 3 of this act may suspend the privileges granted by the
endorsement for up to seven days. Within twenty-four hours of the discovery of
the violation, the inspecting entity must notify the department of the
violation. Upon notification, the department may proceed with the procedures
outlined in this section for suspension of the endorsement. If the violation
of a state board of health rule is discovered by a local health department,
that local jurisdiction may fine the holder of the direct retail endorsement
according to the local jurisdiction's rules as they apply to retail food
operations.

(5) Subsections (2) and
(3) of this section do not apply to a holder of a direct retail endorsement
that executes a surety bond and abides by the conditions established in RCW 77.65.320
and 77.65.330 as they apply to wholesale dealers.

Sec. 5. RCW 77.65.280 and 2000 c
107 s 48 are each amended to read as follows:

A wholesale fish
dealer's license is required for:

(1) A business in the
state to engage in the commercial processing of food fish or shellfish,
including custom canning or processing of personal use food fish or shellfish.

(2) A business in the
state to engage in the wholesale selling, buying, or brokering of food fish or
shellfish. A wholesale fish dealer's license is not required of those
businesses which buy exclusively from Washington licensed wholesale dealers and
sell solely at retail.

(3) ((Fishermen who
land and sell their catch or harvest in the state to anyone other than a licensed
wholesale dealer within or outside the state.

(4))) A business to engage in the commercial
manufacture or preparation of fertilizer, oil, meal, caviar, fish bait, or
other byproducts from food fish or shellfish.

(((5))) (4)
A business employing a fish buyer as defined under RCW 77.65.340.

The annual license fee
for a wholesale dealer is two hundred fifty dollars. A wholesale fish dealer's
license is not required for persons engaged in the processing, wholesale
selling, buying, or brokering of private sector cultured aquatic products as
defined in RCW 15.85.020. However, if a means of identifying such products is
required by rules adopted under RCW 15.85.060, the exemption from licensing
requirements established by this subsection applies only if the aquatic
products are identified in conformance with those rules.

Sec. 6. RCW 77.15.565 and 2000 c
107 s 12 are each amended to read as follows:

Since violation of the
rules of the department relating to the accounting of the commercial harvest of
food fish and shellfish result in damage to the resources of the state,
liability for damage to food fish and shellfish resources is imposed on a
wholesale fish dealer or the holder of a direct retail endorsement for
violation of a provision in chapter 77.65 RCW or a rule of the department
related to the accounting of the commercial harvest of food fish and shellfish
and shall be for the actual damages or for damages imposed as follows:

(1) For violation of
rules requiring the timely presentation to the department of documents relating
to the accounting of commercial harvest, fifty dollars for each of the first
fifteen documents in a series and ten dollars for each subsequent document in
the same series. If documents relating to the accounting of commercial harvest
of food fish and shellfish are lost or destroyed and the wholesale dealer or
holder of a direct retail endorsement notifies the department in writing
within seven days of the loss or destruction, the director shall waive the
requirement for timely presentation of the documents.

(2) For violation of
rules requiring accurate and legible information relating to species, value,
harvest area, or amount of harvest, twenty-five dollars for each of the first
five violations of this subsection following July 28, 1985, and fifty dollars
for each violation after the first five violations.

(3) For violations of
rules requiring certain signatures, fifty dollars for each of the first two
violations and one hundred dollars for each subsequent violation. For the
purposes of this subsection, each signature is a separate requirement.

(4) For other
violations of rules relating to the accounting of the commercial harvest, fifty
dollars for each separate violation.

Sec. 7. RCW 77.15.620 and 2000 c
107 s 253 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) A person is guilty
of engaging in fish dealing activity without a license in the second degree if
the person:

(a) Engages in the
commercial processing of fish or shellfish, including custom canning or
processing of personal use fish or shellfish and does not hold a wholesale dealer's
license required by RCW 77.65.280(1) or 77.65.480 for anadromous game fish,
or a direct retail endorsement under section 2 of this act;

(b) Engages in the
wholesale selling, buying, or brokering of food fish or shellfish and does not
hold a wholesale dealer's or buying license required by RCW 77.65.280(2) or
77.65.480 for anadromous game fish;

(c) Is a fisher who
lands and sells his or her catch or harvest in the state to anyone other than a
licensed wholesale dealer within or outside the state and does not hold a ((wholesale
dealer's license required by RCW 77.65.280(3) or 77.65.480 for anadromous game
fish)) direct retail endorsement required by section 2 of this act;
or

(d) Engages in the
commercial manufacture or preparation of fertilizer, oil, meal, caviar, fish
bait, or other byproducts from food fish or shellfish and does not hold a
wholesale dealer's license required by RCW 77.65.280(((4))) (3)
or 77.65.480 for anadromous game fish.

(2) Engaging in fish
dealing activity without a license in the second degree is a gross misdemeanor.

(3) A person is guilty
of engaging in fish dealing activity without a license in the first degree if
the person commits the act described by subsection (1) of this section and the
violation involves fish or shellfish worth two hundred fifty dollars or more.
Engaging in fish dealing activity without a license in the first degree is a
class C felony.

Sec. 8. RCW 77.15.640 and 2000 c
107 s 255 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) A person who holds
a wholesale fish dealer's license required by RCW 77.65.280, an anadromous game
fish buyer's license required by RCW 77.65.480, ((or)) a fish buyer's
license required by RCW 77.65.340, or a direct retail endorsement under
section 2 of this act is guilty of violating rules governing wholesale fish
buying and dealing if the person:

(a) Fails to possess or
display his or her license when engaged in any act requiring the license;

(b) Fails to display or
uses the license in violation of any rule of the department;

(c) Files a signed
fish-receiving ticket but fails to provide all information required by rule of
the department; or

(d) Violates any other
rule of the department regarding wholesale fish buying and dealing.

(2) Violating rules governing
wholesale fish buying and dealing is a gross misdemeanor.

Sec. 9. RCW 36.71.090 and 1984 c
25 s 4 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) It shall be
lawful for any farmer, gardener, or other person, without license, to sell,
deliver, or peddle any fruits, vegetables, berries, eggs, or any farm produce
or edibles raised, gathered, produced, or manufactured by such person and no
city or town shall pass or enforce any ordinance prohibiting the sale by or
requiring license from the producers and manufacturers of farm produce and
edibles as herein defined: PROVIDED, That nothing herein authorizes any person
to sell, deliver, or peddle, without license, in any city or town, any dairy
product, meat, poultry, eel, fish, mollusk, or shellfish where a license is
required to engage legally in such activity in such city or town.

(2) It is lawful for
an individual in possession of a valid direct retail endorsement, as
established in section 2 of this act, to sell, deliver, or peddle wild-caught
finfish or crab that is caught, harvested, or collected under rule of the
department of fish and wildlife by such a person at a temporary food service
establishment, as that term is defined in RCW 69.06.045, and no city, town, or
county may pass or enforce an ordinance prohibiting the sale by or requiring
additional licenses or permits from the holder of the valid direct retail
endorsement. However, this subsection does not prohibit a city, town, or
county from inspecting an individual displaying a direct retail endorsement to
verify that the person is in compliance with state board of health and local
rules for food service operations.

Sec. 10. RCW 69.07.100 and 1995 c
374 s 22 are each amended to read as follows:

The provisions of this
chapter shall not apply to establishments issued a permit or licensed under the
provisions of:

(1) Chapter 69.25 RCW,
the Washington wholesome eggs and egg products act;

(2) Chapter 69.28 RCW,
the Washington state honey act;

(3) Chapter 16.49 RCW,
the Meat inspection act;

(4) Chapter 77.65
RCW, relating to the direct retail endorsement for wild-caught seafood;

(5) Title 66
RCW, relating to alcoholic beverage control; and

(((5))) (6)
Chapter 69.30 RCW, the Sanitary control of shellfish act((: PROVIDED, That)).
However, if any such establishments process foods not specifically provided
for in the above entitled acts, such establishments shall be subject to the
provisions of this chapter.

The provisions of this
chapter shall not apply to restaurants or food service establishments.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
11. A new section is added
to chapter 69.04 RCW to read as follows:

The department of
agriculture must develop a pamphlet that generally describes the labeling
requirements for seafood, as set forth in this chapter, and provide an adequate
quantity of the pamphlets to the department of fish and wildlife to distribute
with the issuance of a direct retail endorsement under section 2 of this act.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 12. This act takes effect
January 1, 2003.

---
END ---