BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF
WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec.
1. The legislature finds and
declares that the distribution of food by donors to charitable organizations,
such as shelters, churches, and fraternal organizations, serving communal meals
to needy individuals can be done safely consistent with recommended health and
safety guidelines. The establishment of recommended guidelines by the state
board of health can educate the public about the preparation and handling of
food donated to charities for distribution to homeless and other needy people.
A federal study found that of three hundred fifty-six billion pounds of
foodstuffs available for consumption each year in America, at least ninety-six
billion pounds are squandered. The purpose of this act is to authorize and
facilitate the donation of food to needy persons in accordance with safety and
health guidelines to assure that the donated food will not place needy
recipients at risk, to ensure that persons preparing food for and participating
in community potluck meals are included within this authorization, and to
encourage charitable organizations, businesses, and individuals to donate
surplus food to charities serving our state's needy population.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
2. A new section is added
to chapter 69.80 RCW to read as follows:

(1) Except as expressly
prohibited by rule of the state board of health, a donor may donate food in
either raw, cooked, processed, or prepared edible form, free of charge, to a
distributing organization, including charitable nonprofit organizations, or to
the public, for the purpose of serving needy people if the donor and recipient
organization comply with health and safety guidelines developed by the state
board of health.

(2) If a local board of
health adopts a rule concerning charitable food donation more stringent than
the state board of health food rule, the local board of health shall first
provide notice to the public and written notice to cities, towns, and counties
within its jurisdiction prior to the public hearing to consider the rule. The
local board of health shall also provide notice to known charitable
organizations.

(3) The state board of
health shall promulgate recommended health and safety guidelines for the
donation, preparation, and distribution of free food for the purpose of this
chapter.

(4) The health and
safety guidelines promulgated for food shall address potlucks where the public
is invited.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 3. This act takes effect
January 1, 2003; except that the promulgation by the state board of health of
rules and recommended guidelines for the health and safety for the donation,
preparation, and distribution of food is necessary for the immediate
preservation of the public peace, health, or safety, or support of the state
government and its existing public institutions, and takes effect immediately.

---
END ---