BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF
WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec.
1. The legislature makes the
following findings:

(1) A vast and growing
body of research and information about changes to our global, national, and
regional climates is being produced by a variety of sources.

(2) Much of this
research and information holds important value in helping scientists, citizens,
businesses, and public policymakers understand how Washington may be affected
by these changes.

(3) It is in the public
interest to support efforts to promote discussion and understanding of the
potential effects of climate change on Washington's water supply, agriculture,
natural resources, coastal infrastructure, public health, and economy, and to
encourage the formulation of sound recommendations for avoiding, mitigating,
and responding to those effects.

(4) The state should
support the establishment of a central clearinghouse to serve as an impartial,
unbiased source of credible and reliable information about climate change for
the public.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
2. The definitions in this
section apply throughout sections 3 through 5 of this act unless the context
clearly requires otherwise.

(1) "Center"
means the Washington climate and rural energy development center.

(2) "Clean energy
activities" means: (a) Activities related to renewable resources including
electricity generation facilities fueled by water, wind, solar energy,
geothermal energy, landfill gas, or bioenergy; (b) programs and industries
promoting research, development, or commercialization of fuel cells and
qualified alternative energy resources as defined in RCW 19.29A.090; (c) energy
efficiency measures or technologies; and (d) technologies designed to
significantly reduce the use of or emissions from motor vehicle fuels.

(3) "Climate
change" means a change of climate attributed directly or indirectly to
human activity that alters the composition of the global atmosphere.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
3. The legislature
authorizes the establishment of the Washington climate and rural energy
development center in the Washington State University energy program to serve
as a central, nonregulatory clearinghouse of credible and reliable information
addressing various aspects of climate change and clean energy activities.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
4. The center shall be
funded through grants, and voluntary monetary and in-kind contributions.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
5. (1) The duties of the
center may include, but are not limited to:

(a) Collecting and
sharing scientific and technological data related to climate change;

(b) Collecting and
sharing information which could be used on a voluntary basis to respond to
potential climate change impacts should they occur;

(c) Collecting and
sharing information about clean energy activities in the rural areas of the
state, including information about state resources available for developing
such clean energy opportunities;

(d) Advising relevant
sectors of prospective commercial opportunities;

(e) Studying and
advising the legislature on the potential: (i) Impacts of climate change in
the state; and (ii) effects of early action by the state, before action by the
federal government or other state governments, on the state's competitive
position with respect to other states;

(f) Accomplishing any
other duty assigned to it by the legislature for which adequate funding is
provided; and

(g) Providing a
biennial report to the governor and the appropriate legislative committees by
December 31st regarding its operations.

(2) The center shall,
within available funds, also:

(a) Identify key
sectors within the state likely to be affected adversely by climate change;

(b) Examine and report
the feasibility of a carbon storage program for the state by:

(i) Evaluating other
states' and nations' attempts to establish carbon credit programs, carbon
storage programs, carbon storage requirements worldwide, and methods and
scientific programs that are used to implement carbon storage programs;

(ii) Analyzing other
programs in the state of Washington, including the conservation reserve
enhancement program, that could facilitate a carbon storage program and a
stable carbon storage market;

(iii) Analyzing methods
to encourage and increase appropriate carbon storage activities; and

(iv) Developing and
preparing appropriate legislative responses and recommendations; and

(c) Publicize
mitigation projects and efforts to address climate change that include
evaluations of whether those efforts were deemed to be successful.

(3) The following
agencies and programs will work with the center to assist with the duties under
this section: The department of community, trade, and economic development,
the department of ecology, the department of transportation, the department of
health, the department of fish and wildlife, the department of agriculture, the
department of natural resources, and the Washington State University energy
program.

(4) The legislature may
appoint one member from each legislative caucus to serve on a legislative
oversight committee for the center.

(5) The center shall
establish task forces and technical advisory committees, balanced in
representation and composed of state and local agencies and interested elected
leaders, businesses, labor groups, timber industry groups, agricultural groups,
nonprofit organizations, university and college programs, and citizens as
necessary to assist in the duties in this section.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
6. This act takes effect
July 1, 2002.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 7. Sections 2 through 5 of
this act are each added to chapter 28B.30 RCW.

---
END ---