BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF
WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1. RCW 28B.15.012 and 2000
c 117 s 2 are each amended to read as follows:

Whenever used in
chapter 28B.15 RCW:

(1) The term
"institution" shall mean a public university, college, or community
college within the state of Washington.

(2) The term
"resident student" shall mean:

(a) A financially
independent student who has had a domicile in the state of Washington for the
period of one year immediately prior to the time of commencement of the first
day of the semester or quarter for which the student has registered at any
institution and has in fact established a bona fide domicile in this state
primarily for purposes other than educational;

(b) A dependent
student, if one or both of the student's parents or legal guardians have
maintained a bona fide domicile in the state of Washington for at least one
year immediately prior to commencement of the semester or quarter for which the
student has registered at any institution;

(c) A student
classified as a resident based upon domicile by an institution on or before May
31, 1982, who was enrolled at a state institution during any term of the
1982-1983 academic year, so long as such student's enrollment (excepting summer
sessions) at an institution in this state is continuous;

(d) Any student who has
spent at least seventy-five percent of both his or her junior and senior years
in high schools in this state, whose parents or legal guardians have been
domiciled in the state for a period of at least one year within the five-year
period before the student graduates from high school, and who enrolls in a
public institution of higher education within six months of leaving high
school, for as long as the student remains continuously enrolled for three
quarters or two semesters in any calendar year;

(e) A student who is on
active military duty stationed in the state;

(f) A student who is
the spouse or a dependent of a person who is on active military duty stationed
in the state;

(g) A student of an
out-of-state institution of higher education who is attending a Washington
state institution of higher education pursuant to a home tuition agreement as
described in RCW 28B.15.725; ((or))

(h) A student who meets
the requirements of RCW 28B.15.0131: PROVIDED, That a nonresident student
enrolled for more than six hours per semester or quarter shall be considered as
attending for primarily educational purposes, and for tuition and fee paying
purposes only such period of enrollment shall not be counted toward the
establishment of a bona fide domicile of one year in this state unless such
student proves that the student has in fact established a bona fide domicile in
this state primarily for purposes other than educational; or

(i) A student who
has graduated from high school in this state or received the equivalent of a
high school diploma in this state and has registered at any institution and has
had a domicile in the state of Washington for the period of one year
immediately before the time of commencement of the first day of the semester or
quarter for which the student has been admitted and has in fact established a
bona fide domicile in this state primarily for purposes other than educational
and has provided an affidavit to the institution stating the individual will
file an application for legal residency in the United States at the earliest opportunity
the individual is eligible to do so.

(3) The term
"nonresident student" shall mean any student who does not qualify as
a "resident student" under the provisions of RCW 28B.15.012 and
28B.15.013. Except for students qualifying under subsection (2)(g) of this
section, a nonresident student shall include:

(a) A student attending
an institution with the aid of financial assistance provided by another state
or governmental unit or agency thereof, such nonresidency continuing for one
year after the completion of such semester or quarter.

(b) A person who is not
a citizen of the United States of America who does not have permanent or
temporary resident status or does not hold "Refugee-Parolee" or
"Conditional Entrant" status with the United States immigration and
naturalization service or is not otherwise permanently residing in the United
States under color of law and who does not also meet and comply with all the
applicable requirements in RCW 28B.15.012 and 28B.15.013.

(4) The term
"domicile" shall denote a person's true, fixed and permanent home and
place of habitation. It is the place where the student intends to remain, and
to which the student expects to return when the student leaves without
intending to establish a new domicile elsewhere. The burden of proof that a
student, parent or guardian has established a domicile in the state of
Washington primarily for purposes other than educational lies with the student.

(5) The term
"dependent" shall mean a person who is not financially independent.
Factors to be considered in determining whether a person is financially
independent shall be set forth in rules and regulations adopted by the higher
education coordinating board and shall include, but not be limited to, the
state and federal income tax returns of the person and/or the student's parents
or legal guardian filed for the calendar year prior to the year in which
application is made and such other evidence as the board may require.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 2. This act takes effect
June 30, 2002.

---
END ---