BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF
WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1. RCW 29.79.010 and 1982 c
116 s 1 are each amended to read as follows:

If any legal voter of
the state, either individually or on behalf of an organization, desires to
petition the legislature to enact a proposed measure, or submit a proposed
initiative measure to the people, or order that a referendum of all or part of
any act, bill, or law, passed by the legislature be submitted to the people, he
or she shall file with the secretary of state a typewritten copy of the measure
proposed, or the act or part of such act on which a referendum is desired,
accompanied by an affidavit that the proposer is a legal voter and ((a
filing fee prescribed under RCW 43.07.120, as now or hereafter amended)) deposit
of either a fee of one hundred dollars or signatures of one hundred registered
voters. If the fee is deposited, it is fully refundable upon either:

(1) The filing of an
affidavit from a printer affirming that sufficient petitions have been printed
and delivered to the petitioner to permit the filing of the number of
signatures required by Article II, section 1 of the state Constitution; or

(2) The
filing of the required number of signatures.

--- END ---