BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF
WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1. RCW 29.07.115 and 1994 c
57 s 15 are each amended to read as follows:

No person,
organization, or association may distribute voter registration applications
within this state that contain a return address other than that of the office
of the secretary of state or the appropriate county auditor.

No person printing
voter registration forms may include advertising of any kind, or statements
advocating or opposing candidates, ballot measures, or political positions, as
a part of the voter registration application.

No person
distributing voter registration forms may use a postal permit to pay the
postage for the individual return of voter registration forms.

A person or
organization collecting voter registration applications has a responsibility to
protect the privacy of persons whom they are assisting with voter
registration. No voter registration form, as established by RCW 29.07.070,
that has been signed by a prospective voter, may be copied before official
processing by county or state voter registration officials.

A person
or organization collecting voter registration application forms must transmit
the forms to the secretary of state or a designee at least once weekly.

--- END ---