BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF
WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec.
1. It is the intent of the
legislature to increase the use of effective substance abuse treatment for
defendants and offenders in Washington in order to make frugal use of state and
local resources, thus reducing recidivism and increasing the likelihood that
defendants and offenders will become productive and law-abiding persons. The
legislature recognizes that substance abuse treatment can be effective if it is
well planned and involves adequate monitoring, and that substance abuse and
addiction is a public safety and public health issue that must be more
effectively addressed if recidivism is to be reduced. The legislature intends
that sentences for drug offenses accurately reflect the adverse impact of
substance abuse and addiction on public safety, that the public must have
protection from violent offenders, and further intends that such sentences be
based on policies that are supported by research and public policy goals
established by the legislature.

Sec. 2. RCW 9.94A.515 and 2001
2nd sp.s. c 12 s 361, 2001 c 300 s 4, 2001 c 217 s 12, and 2001 c 17 s 1 are
each reenacted and amended to read as follows:

TABLE
2

CRIMES
INCLUDED WITHIN EACH SERIOUSNESS LEVEL

XVIAggravated
Murder 1 (RCW 10.95.020)

XVHomicide
by abuse (RCW 9A.32.055)

Malicious
explosion 1 (RCW 70.74.280(1))

Murder
1 (RCW 9A.32.030)

XIVMurder
2 (RCW 9A.32.050)

XIIIMalicious
explosion 2 (RCW 70.74.280(2))

Malicious
placement of an explosive 1 (RCW 70.74.270(1))

XIIAssault
1 (RCW 9A.36.011)

Assault
of a Child 1 (RCW 9A.36.120)

Malicious
placement of an imitation device 1 (RCW 70.74.272(1)(a))

Rape
1 (RCW 9A.44.040)

Rape
of a Child 1 (RCW 9A.44.073)

XIManslaughter
1 (RCW 9A.32.060)

Rape
2 (RCW 9A.44.050)

Rape
of a Child 2 (RCW 9A.44.076)

XChild
Molestation 1 (RCW 9A.44.083)

Indecent
Liberties (with forcible compulsion) (RCW 9A.44.100(1)(a))

Kidnapping
1 (RCW 9A.40.020)

Leading
Organized Crime (RCW 9A.82.060(1)(a))

Malicious
explosion 3 (RCW 70.74.280(3))

Manufacture
of methamphetamine (RCW 69.50.401(a)(1)(ii))

Over
18 and deliver heroin, methamphetamine, a narcotic from Schedule I or II, or
flunitrazepam from Schedule IV to someone under 18 (RCW 69.50.406)

Sexually
Violent Predator Escape (RCW 9A.76.115)

IXAssault
of a Child 2 (RCW 9A.36.130)

Controlled
Substance Homicide (RCW 69.50.415)

Explosive
devices prohibited (RCW 70.74.180)

Hit
and Run‑-Death (RCW 46.52.020(4)(a))

Homicide
by Watercraft, by being under the influence of intoxicating liquor or any drug
(RCW 79A.60.050)

Inciting
Criminal Profiteering (RCW 9A.82.060(1)(b))

Malicious
placement of an explosive 2 (RCW 70.74.270(2))

Over
18 and deliver narcotic from Schedule III, IV, or V or a nonnarcotic, except
flunitrazepam or methamphetamine, from Schedule I-V to someone under 18 and 3
years junior (RCW 69.50.406)

Robbery
1 (RCW 9A.56.200)

Sexual
Exploitation (RCW 9.68A.040)

Vehicular
Homicide, by being under the influence of intoxicating liquor or any drug (RCW
46.61.520)

VIIIArson
1 (RCW 9A.48.020)

Deliver
or possess with intent to deliver methamphetamine (RCW 69.50.401(a)(1)(ii))

Homicide
by Watercraft, by the operation of any vessel in a reckless manner (RCW
79A.60.050)

Manslaughter
2 (RCW 9A.32.070)

Manufacture,
deliver, or possess with intent to deliver amphetamine (RCW
69.50.401(a)(1)(ii))

((Manufacture,
deliver, or possess with intent to deliver heroin or cocaine (RCW 69.50.401(a)(1)(i))))

Possession
of Ephedrine, Pseudoephedrine, or Anhydrous Ammonia with intent to manufacture
methamphetamine (RCW 69.50.440)

Promoting
Prostitution 1 (RCW 9A.88.070)

Selling
for profit (controlled or counterfeit) any controlled substance (RCW 69.50.410)

Theft
of Anhydrous Ammonia (RCW 69.55.010)

Vehicular
Homicide, by the operation of any vehicle in a reckless manner (RCW 46.61.520)

VIIBurglary
1 (RCW 9A.52.020)

Child
Molestation 2 (RCW 9A.44.086)

Dealing
in depictions of minor engaged in sexually explicit conduct (RCW 9.68A.050)

Drive-by
Shooting (RCW 9A.36.045)

Homicide
by Watercraft, by disregard for the safety of others (RCW 79A.60.050)

Indecent
Liberties (without forcible compulsion) (RCW 9A.44.100(1) (b) and (c))

Introducing
Contraband 1 (RCW 9A.76.140)

Involving
a minor in drug dealing (RCW 69.50.401(f))

Malicious
placement of an explosive 3 (RCW 70.74.270(3))

Manufacture,
deliver, or possess with intent to deliver heroin or cocaine (RCW
69.50.401(a)(1)(i))

Sending,
bringing into state depictions of minor engaged in sexually explicit conduct
(RCW 9.68A.060)

Unlawful
Possession of a Firearm in the first degree (RCW 9.41.040(1)(a))

Use
of a Machine Gun in Commission of a Felony (RCW 9.41.225)

Vehicular
Homicide, by disregard for the safety of others (RCW 46.61.520)

VIBail
Jumping with Murder 1 (RCW 9A.76.170(3)(a))

Bribery
(RCW 9A.68.010)

Incest
1 (RCW 9A.64.020(1))

Intimidating
a Judge (RCW 9A.72.160)

Intimidating
a Juror/Witness (RCW 9A.72.110, 9A.72.130)

Malicious
placement of an imitation device 2 (RCW 70.74.272(1)(b))

Manufacture,
deliver, or possess with intent to deliver narcotics from Schedule I or II
(except heroin or cocaine) or flunitrazepam from Schedule IV (RCW
69.50.401(a)(1)(i))

Rape
of a Child 3 (RCW 9A.44.079)

Theft
of a Firearm (RCW 9A.56.300)

Unlawful
Storage of Anhydrous Ammonia (RCW 69.55.020)

VAbandonment
of dependent person 1 (RCW 9A.42.060)

Advancing
money or property for extortionate extension of credit (RCW 9A.82.030)

Bail
Jumping with class A Felony (RCW 9A.76.170(3)(b))

Child
Molestation 3 (RCW 9A.44.089)

Criminal
Mistreatment 1 (RCW 9A.42.020)

Custodial
Sexual Misconduct 1 (RCW 9A.44.160)

Delivery
of imitation controlled substance by person eighteen or over to person under
eighteen (RCW 69.52.030(2))

Domestic
Violence Court Order Violation (RCW 10.99.040, 10.99.050, 26.09.300, 26.10.220,
26.26.138, 26.50.110, 26.52.070, or 74.34.145)

Extortion
1 (RCW 9A.56.120)

Extortionate
Extension of Credit (RCW 9A.82.020)

Extortionate
Means to Collect Extensions of Credit (RCW 9A.82.040)

Incest
2 (RCW 9A.64.020(2))

Kidnapping
2 (RCW 9A.40.030)

Perjury
1 (RCW 9A.72.020)

Persistent
prison misbehavior (RCW 9.94.070)

Possession
of a Stolen Firearm (RCW 9A.56.310)

Rape
3 (RCW 9A.44.060)

Rendering
Criminal Assistance 1 (RCW 9A.76.070)

Sexual
Misconduct with a Minor 1 (RCW 9A.44.093)

Sexually
Violating Human Remains (RCW 9A.44.105)

Stalking
(RCW 9A.46.110)

IVArson
2 (RCW 9A.48.030)

Assault
2 (RCW 9A.36.021)

Assault
by Watercraft (RCW 79A.60.060)

Bribing
a Witness/Bribe Received by Witness (RCW 9A.72.090, 9A.72.100)

Commercial
Bribery (RCW 9A.68.060)

Counterfeiting
(RCW 9.16.035(4))

Escape
1 (RCW 9A.76.110)

Hit
and Run‑-Injury (RCW 46.52.020(4)(b))

Hit
and Run with Vessel‑-Injury Accident (RCW 79A.60.200(3))

Identity
Theft 1 (RCW 9.35.020(2)(a))

Indecent
Exposure to Person Under Age Fourteen (subsequent sex offense) (RCW 9A.88.010)

Influencing
Outcome of Sporting Event (RCW 9A.82.070)

Knowingly
Trafficking in Stolen Property (RCW 9A.82.050(2))

Malicious
Harassment (RCW 9A.36.080)

Manufacture,
deliver, or possess with intent to deliver narcotics from Schedule III, IV, or
V or nonnarcotics from Schedule I-V (except marijuana, amphetamine,
methamphetamines, or flunitrazepam) (RCW 69.50.401(a)(1) (iii) through (v))

Residential
Burglary (RCW 9A.52.025)

Robbery
2 (RCW 9A.56.210)

Theft
of Livestock 1 (RCW 9A.56.080)

Threats
to Bomb (RCW 9.61.160)

Use
of Proceeds of Criminal Profiteering (RCW 9A.82.080 (1) and (2))

Vehicular
Assault, by being under the influence of intoxicating liquor or any drug, or by
the operation or driving of a vehicle in a reckless manner (RCW 46.61.522)

Willful
Failure to Return from Furlough (RCW 72.66.060)

IIIAbandonment
of dependent person 2 (RCW 9A.42.070)

Assault
3 (RCW 9A.36.031)

Assault
of a Child 3 (RCW 9A.36.140)

Bail
Jumping with class B or C Felony (RCW 9A.76.170(3)(c))

Burglary
2 (RCW 9A.52.030)

Communication
with a Minor for Immoral Purposes (RCW 9.68A.090)

Criminal
Gang Intimidation (RCW 9A.46.120)

Criminal
Mistreatment 2 (RCW 9A.42.030)

Custodial
Assault (RCW 9A.36.100)

Delivery
of a material in lieu of a controlled substance (RCW 69.50.401(c))

Escape
2 (RCW 9A.76.120)

Extortion
2 (RCW 9A.56.130)

Harassment
(RCW 9A.46.020)

Intimidating
a Public Servant (RCW 9A.76.180)

Introducing
Contraband 2 (RCW 9A.76.150)

Maintaining
a Dwelling or Place for Controlled Substances (RCW 69.50.402(a)(6))

Malicious
Injury to Railroad Property (RCW 81.60.070)

Manufacture,
deliver, or possess with intent to deliver marijuana (RCW 69.50.401(a)(1)(iii))

Manufacture,
distribute, or possess with intent to distribute an imitation controlled
substance (RCW 69.52.030(1))

Patronizing
a Juvenile Prostitute (RCW 9.68A.100)

Perjury
2 (RCW 9A.72.030)

Possession
of Incendiary Device (RCW 9.40.120)

Possession
of Machine Gun or Short-Barreled Shotgun or Rifle (RCW 9.41.190)

Promoting
Prostitution 2 (RCW 9A.88.080)

Recklessly
Trafficking in Stolen Property (RCW 9A.82.050(1))

Securities
Act violation (RCW 21.20.400)

Tampering
with a Witness (RCW 9A.72.120)

Telephone
Harassment (subsequent conviction or threat of death) (RCW 9.61.230)

Theft
of Livestock 2 (RCW 9A.56.080)

Unlawful
Imprisonment (RCW 9A.40.040)

Unlawful
possession of firearm in the second degree (RCW 9.41.040(1)(b))

Unlawful
Use of Building for Drug Purposes (RCW 69.53.010)

Vehicular
Assault, by the operation or driving of a vehicle with disregard for the safety
of others (RCW 46.61.522)

Willful
Failure to Return from Work Release (RCW 72.65.070)

IIComputer
Trespass 1 (RCW 9A.52.110)

Counterfeiting
(RCW 9.16.035(3))

Create,
deliver, or possess a counterfeit controlled substance (RCW 69.50.401(b))

Escape
from Community Custody (RCW 72.09.310)

Health
Care False Claims (RCW 48.80.030)

Identity
Theft 2 (RCW 9.35.020(2)(b))

Improperly
Obtaining Financial Information (RCW 9.35.010)

Malicious
Mischief 1 (RCW 9A.48.070)

Possession
of controlled substance that is either heroin or narcotics from Schedule I or
II or flunitrazepam from Schedule IV (RCW 69.50.401(d))

Possession
of phencyclidine (PCP) (RCW 69.50.401(d))

Possession
of Stolen Property 1 (RCW 9A.56.150)

Theft
1 (RCW 9A.56.030)

Theft
of Rental, Leased, or Lease-purchased Property (valued at one thousand five
hundred dollars or more) (RCW 9A.56.096(4))

Trafficking
in Insurance Claims (RCW 48.30A.015)

Unlawful
Practice of Law (RCW 2.48.180)

Unlicensed
Practice of a Profession or Business (RCW 18.130.190(7))

IAttempting
to Elude a Pursuing Police Vehicle (RCW 46.61.024)

False
Verification for Welfare (RCW 74.08.055)

Forged
Prescription (RCW 69.41.020)

Forged
Prescription for a Controlled Substance (RCW 69.50.403)

Forgery
(RCW 9A.60.020)

Malicious
Mischief 2 (RCW 9A.48.080)

Possess
Controlled Substance that is a Narcotic from Schedule III, IV, or V or
Non-narcotic from Schedule I-V (except phencyclidine or flunitrazepam) (RCW
69.50.401(d))

Possession
of Stolen Property 2 (RCW 9A.56.160)

Reckless
Burning 1 (RCW 9A.48.040)

Taking
Motor Vehicle Without Permission (RCW 9A.56.070)

Theft
2 (RCW 9A.56.040)

Theft
of Rental, Leased, or Lease-purchased Property (valued at two hundred fifty
dollars or more but less than one thousand five hundred dollars) (RCW
9A.56.096(4))

Unlawful
Issuance of Checks or Drafts (RCW 9A.56.060)

Unlawful
Use of Food Stamps (RCW 9.91.140 (2) and (3))

Vehicle
Prowl 1 (RCW 9A.52.095)

Sec. 3. RCW 9.94A.525 and 2001 c
264 s 5 are each amended to read as follows:

The offender score is
measured on the horizontal axis of the sentencing grid. The offender score
rules are as follows:

The offender score is
the sum of points accrued under this section rounded down to the nearest whole
number.

(1) A prior conviction
is a conviction which exists before the date of sentencing for the offense for
which the offender score is being computed. Convictions entered or sentenced
on the same date as the conviction for which the offender score is being
computed shall be deemed "other current offenses" within the meaning
of RCW 9.94A.589.

(2) Class A and sex
prior felony convictions shall always be included in the offender score. Class
B prior felony convictions other than sex offenses shall not be included in the
offender score, if since the last date of release from confinement (including
full-time residential treatment) pursuant to a felony conviction, if any, or
entry of judgment and sentence, the offender had spent ten consecutive years in
the community without committing any crime that subsequently results in a
conviction. Class C prior felony convictions other than sex offenses shall not
be included in the offender score if, since the last date of release from
confinement (including full-time residential treatment) pursuant to a felony
conviction, if any, or entry of judgment and sentence, the offender had spent
five consecutive years in the community without committing any crime that
subsequently results in a conviction. Serious traffic convictions shall not be
included in the offender score if, since the last date of release from
confinement (including full-time residential treatment) pursuant to a felony
conviction, if any, or entry of judgment and sentence, the offender spent five
years in the community without committing any crime that subsequently results
in a conviction. This subsection applies to both adult and juvenile prior
convictions.

(3) Out-of-state
convictions for offenses shall be classified according to the comparable
offense definitions and sentences provided by Washington law. Federal
convictions for offenses shall be classified according to the comparable
offense definitions and sentences provided by Washington law. If there is no
clearly comparable offense under Washington law or the offense is one that is
usually considered subject to exclusive federal jurisdiction, the offense shall
be scored as a class C felony equivalent if it was a felony under the relevant
federal statute.

(4) Score prior
convictions for felony anticipatory offenses (attempts, criminal solicitations,
and criminal conspiracies) the same as if they were convictions for completed
offenses.

(5)(a) In the case of
multiple prior convictions, for the purpose of computing the offender score,
count all convictions separately, except:

(i) Prior offenses
which were found, under RCW 9.94A.589(1)(a), to encompass the same criminal
conduct, shall be counted as one offense, the offense that yields the highest
offender score. The current sentencing court shall determine with respect to
other prior adult offenses for which sentences were served concurrently or
prior juvenile offenses for which sentences were served consecutively, whether
those offenses shall be counted as one offense or as separate offenses using
the "same criminal conduct" analysis found in RCW 9.94A.589(1)(a),
and if the court finds that they shall be counted as one offense, then the
offense that yields the highest offender score shall be used. The current
sentencing court may presume that such other prior offenses were not the same
criminal conduct from sentences imposed on separate dates, or in separate
counties or jurisdictions, or in separate complaints, indictments, or
informations;

(ii) In the case of
multiple prior convictions for offenses committed before July 1, 1986, for the
purpose of computing the offender score, count all adult convictions served
concurrently as one offense, and count all juvenile convictions entered on the
same date as one offense. Use the conviction for the offense that yields the
highest offender score.

(b) As used in this
subsection (5), "served concurrently" means that: (i) The latter
sentence was imposed with specific reference to the former; (ii) the concurrent
relationship of the sentences was judicially imposed; and (iii) the concurrent
timing of the sentences was not the result of a probation or parole revocation
on the former offense.

(6) If the present
conviction is one of the anticipatory offenses of criminal attempt,
solicitation, or conspiracy, count each prior conviction as if the present
conviction were for a completed offense. When these convictions are used as
criminal history, score them the same as a completed crime.

(7) If the present
conviction is for a nonviolent offense and not covered by subsection (11) or
(12) of this section, count one point for each adult prior felony conviction
and one point for each juvenile prior violent felony conviction and 1/2 point
for each juvenile prior nonviolent felony conviction.

(8) If the present
conviction is for a violent offense and not covered in subsection (9), (10),
(11), or (12) of this section, count two points for each prior adult and
juvenile violent felony conviction, one point for each prior adult nonviolent
felony conviction, and 1/2 point for each prior juvenile nonviolent felony
conviction.

(9) If the present
conviction is for a serious violent offense, count three points for prior adult
and juvenile convictions for crimes in this category, two points for each prior
adult and juvenile violent conviction (not already counted), one point for each
prior adult nonviolent felony conviction, and 1/2 point for each prior juvenile
nonviolent felony conviction.

(10) If the present
conviction is for Burglary 1, count prior convictions as in subsection (8) of
this section; however count two points for each prior adult Burglary 2 or
residential burglary conviction, and one point for each prior juvenile Burglary
2 or residential burglary conviction.

(11) If the present
conviction is for a felony traffic offense count two points for each adult or
juvenile prior conviction for Vehicular Homicide or Vehicular Assault; for each
felony offense count one point for each adult and 1/2 point for each juvenile
prior conviction; for each serious traffic offense, other than those used for
an enhancement pursuant to RCW 46.61.520(2), count one point for each adult and
1/2 point for each juvenile prior conviction.

(12) If the present
conviction is for ((a drug offense)) manufacture of methamphetamine
count three points for each adult prior ((felony drug offense)) manufacture
of methamphetamine conviction and two points for each juvenile ((drug))
manufacture of methamphetamine offense. All other adult and juvenile
felonies are scored as in subsection (8) of this section if the current drug
offense is violent, or as in subsection (7) of this section if the current drug
offense is nonviolent.

(13) If the present
conviction is for Escape from Community Custody, RCW 72.09.310, count only
prior escape convictions in the offender score. Count adult prior escape
convictions as one point and juvenile prior escape convictions as 1/2 point.

(14) If the present
conviction is for Escape 1, RCW 9A.76.110, or Escape 2, RCW 9A.76.120, count
adult prior convictions as one point and juvenile prior convictions as 1/2
point.

(15) If the present
conviction is for Burglary 2 or residential burglary, count priors as in
subsection (7) of this section; however, count two points for each adult and
juvenile prior Burglary 1 conviction, two points for each adult prior Burglary
2 or residential burglary conviction, and one point for each juvenile prior
Burglary 2 or residential burglary conviction.

(16) If the present
conviction is for a sex offense, count priors as in subsections (7) through
(15) of this section; however count three points for each adult and juvenile
prior sex offense conviction.

(17) If the present
conviction is for an offense committed while the offender was under community
placement, add one point.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
4. A new section is added
to chapter 70.96A RCW to read as follows:

(1) The criminal
justice treatment account is created in the state treasury. Moneys in the
account may be expended solely for: (a) Substance abuse treatment for
offenders with an addiction or a substance abuse problem that, if not treated,
would result in addiction, against whom charges are filed by a prosecuting
attorney in Washington state; and (b) the provision of drug and alcohol
services for nonviolent offenders within a drug court program. Moneys in the
account may be spent only after appropriation.

(2) Revenues to the
criminal justice treatment account consist of: (a) Savings to the state
general fund resulting from implementation of this act, as calculated pursuant
to this section; and (b) any other revenues appropriated to or deposited in the
account.

(3)(a) The department
of corrections, the sentencing guidelines commission, the office of financial
management, and the caseload forecast council shall develop a methodology for
calculating the projected biennial savings under this section. Savings shall
be projected for the fiscal biennium beginning on July 1, 2003, and for each
biennium thereafter. By September 1, 2002, the proposed methodology shall be
submitted to the governor and the appropriate committees of the legislature.
The methodology is deemed approved unless the legislature enacts legislation to
modify or reject the methodology.

(b) When the department
of corrections submits its biennial budget request to the governor in 2002 and
in each even-numbered year thereafter, the department of corrections shall use
the methodology approved in (a) of this subsection to calculate savings to the
state general fund for the ensuing fiscal biennium resulting from reductions in
drug offender sentencing as a result of sections 2 and 3, chapter
. . ., Laws of 2002 (sections 2 and 3 this act) and sections 7, 8,
and 9, chapter . . ., Laws of 2002 (sections 7, 8, and 9 this act).
The department shall report the dollar amount of the savings to the state
treasurer, the office of financial management, and the fiscal committees of the
legislature.

(c) For the fiscal
biennium beginning July 1, 2003, and each fiscal biennium thereafter, the state
treasurer shall transfer seventy-five percent of the amount reported in (b) of
this subsection from the general fund into the criminal justice treatment
account, divided into eight equal quarterly payments. However, the amount
transferred to the criminal justice treatment account shall not exceed the
limit of seven million five hundred thousand dollars per fiscal year. After
the first fiscal year in which the amount to be transferred equals or exceeds
seven million five hundred thousand dollars, this limit shall be increased on
an annual basis by the implicit price deflator as published by the federal
bureau of labor statistics.

(d) For the fiscal
biennium beginning July 1, 2003, and each biennium thereafter, the state
treasurer shall transfer twenty-five percent of the amount reported in (b) of
this subsection from the general fund into the violence reduction and drug
enforcement account, divided into eight quarterly payments. The amounts
transferred pursuant to this subsection (3)(d) shall be used solely for
providing drug and alcohol treatment services to offenders confined in a state
correctional facility receiving a reduced sentence as a result of
implementation of this act and who are assessed with an addiction or a
substance abuse problem that if not treated would result in addiction. Any
excess funds remaining after providing drug and alcohol treatment services to
offenders receiving a reduced sentence as a result of implementation of this
act may be expended to provide treatment for offenders confined in a state
correctional facility and who are assessed with an addiction or a substance
abuse problem that contributed to the crime.

(e) In each
odd-numbered year, the legislature shall appropriate the amount transferred to
the criminal justice treatment account in (c) of this subsection to the
division of alcohol and substance abuse for the purposes of subsection (4) of
this section.

(4) Moneys appropriated
to the division of alcohol and substance abuse from the criminal justice
treatment account shall be distributed as specified in this subsection. The
department shall serve as the fiscal agent for purposes of distribution. Until
July 1, 2004, the department may not use moneys appropriated from the criminal
justice treatment account for administrative expenses and shall distribute all
amounts appropriated under subsection (3)(e) of this section in accordance with
this subsection. Beginning in July 1, 2004, the department may retain up to
three percent of the amount appropriated under subsection (3)(e) of this
section for its administrative costs.

(a) Seventy percent of
amounts appropriated to the division from the account shall be distributed to
counties pursuant to the distribution formula adopted under this section. The
division of alcohol and substance abuse, in consultation with the department of
corrections, the sentencing guidelines commission, the Washington state association
of counties, the Washington state association of drug court professionals, the
superior court judges' association, the Washington association of prosecuting
attorneys, representatives of the criminal defense bar, representatives of
substance abuse treatment providers, and any other person deemed by the
division to be necessary, shall establish a fair and reasonable methodology for
distribution to counties of moneys in the criminal justice treatment account.
County or regional plans submitted for the expenditure of formula funds must be
approved by the panel established in (b) of this subsection.

(b) Thirty percent of
the amounts appropriated to the division from the account shall be distributed
as grants for purposes of treating offenders against whom charges are filed by
a county prosecuting attorney. The division shall appoint a panel of
representatives from the Washington association of prosecuting attorneys, the
Washington association of sheriffs and police chiefs, the superior court judges'
association, the Washington state association of counties, the Washington
defender's association or the Washington association of criminal defense
lawyers, the department of corrections, the Washington state association of
drug court professionals, substance abuse treatment providers, and the
division. The panel shall review county or regional plans for funding under
(a) of this subsection and grants approved under this subsection. The panel
shall attempt to ensure that treatment as funded by the grants is available to
offenders statewide.

(5) The county alcohol
and drug coordinator, county prosecutor, county sheriff, county superior court,
a substance abuse treatment provider appointed by the county legislative
authority, a member of the criminal defense bar appointed by the county
legislative authority, and, in counties with a drug court, a representative of
the drug court shall jointly submit a plan, approved by the county legislative
authority or authorities, to the panel established in subsection (4)(b) of this
section, for disposition of all the funds provided from the criminal justice
treatment account within that county. The funds shall be used solely to
provide approved alcohol and substance abuse treatment pursuant to RCW
70.96A.090.

(6) Counties are
encouraged to consider regional agreements and submit regional plans for the
efficient delivery of treatment under this section.

(7) Moneys allocated
under this section shall be used to supplement, not supplant, other federal,
state, and local funds used for substance abuse treatment.

(8) Counties must meet
the criteria established in RCW 2.28.170(3)(b).

NEW SECTION. Sec.
5. A new section is added
to chapter 43.135 RCW to read as follows:

RCW 43.135.035(4) does
not apply to the transfers established in section 4 of this act.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
6. A new section is added
to chapter 43.20A RCW to read as follows:

The department of
social and health services shall annually review and monitor the expenditures
made by any county or group of counties which is funded, in whole or in part,
with funds provided by this act. Counties shall repay any funds that are not
spent in accordance with the requirements of this act.

Sec. 7. RCW 9.94A.515 and 2001
2nd sp.s. c 12 s 361, 2001 c 300 s 4, 2001 c 217 s 12, and 2001 c 17 s 1 are
each reenacted and amended to read as follows:

TABLE
2

CRIMES
INCLUDED WITHIN EACH SERIOUSNESS LEVEL

XVIAggravated
Murder 1 (RCW 10.95.020)

XVHomicide
by abuse (RCW 9A.32.055)

Malicious
explosion 1 (RCW 70.74.280(1))

Murder
1 (RCW 9A.32.030)

XIVMurder
2 (RCW 9A.32.050)

XIIIMalicious
explosion 2 (RCW 70.74.280(2))

Malicious
placement of an explosive 1 (RCW 70.74.270(1))

XIIAssault
1 (RCW 9A.36.011)

Assault
of a Child 1 (RCW 9A.36.120)

Malicious
placement of an imitation device 1 (RCW 70.74.272(1)(a))

Rape
1 (RCW 9A.44.040)

Rape
of a Child 1 (RCW 9A.44.073)

XIManslaughter
1 (RCW 9A.32.060)

Rape
2 (RCW 9A.44.050)

Rape
of a Child 2 (RCW 9A.44.076)

XChild
Molestation 1 (RCW 9A.44.083)

Indecent
Liberties (with forcible compulsion) (RCW 9A.44.100(1)(a))

Kidnapping
1 (RCW 9A.40.020)

Leading
Organized Crime (RCW 9A.82.060(1)(a))

Malicious
explosion 3 (RCW 70.74.280(3))

((Manufacture
of methamphetamine (RCW 69.50.401(a)(1)(ii))

Over
18 and deliver heroin, methamphetamine, a narcotic from Schedule I or II, or
flunitrazepam from Schedule IV to someone under 18 (RCW 69.50.406)))

Sexually
Violent Predator Escape (RCW 9A.76.115)

IXAssault
of a Child 2 (RCW 9A.36.130)

((Controlled
Substance Homicide (RCW 69.50.415)))

Explosive
devices prohibited (RCW 70.74.180)

Hit
and Run‑-Death (RCW 46.52.020(4)(a))

Homicide
by Watercraft, by being under the influence of intoxicating liquor or any drug
(RCW 79A.60.050)

Inciting
Criminal Profiteering (RCW 9A.82.060(1)(b))

Malicious
placement of an explosive 2 (RCW 70.74.270(2))

((Over
18 and deliver narcotic from Schedule III, IV, or V or a nonnarcotic, except
flunitrazepam or methamphetamine, from Schedule I-V to someone under 18 and 3
years junior (RCW 69.50.406)))

Robbery
1 (RCW 9A.56.200)

Sexual
Exploitation (RCW 9.68A.040)

Vehicular
Homicide, by being under the influence of intoxicating liquor or any drug (RCW
46.61.520)

VIIIArson
1 (RCW 9A.48.020)

((Deliver
or possess with intent to deliver methamphetamine (RCW 69.50.401(a)(1)(ii))))

Homicide
by Watercraft, by the operation of any vessel in a reckless manner (RCW
79A.60.050)

Manslaughter
2 (RCW 9A.32.070)

((Manufacture,
deliver, or possess with intent to deliver amphetamine (RCW
69.50.401(a)(1)(ii))

Manufacture,
deliver, or possess with intent to deliver heroin or cocaine (RCW
69.50.401(a)(1)(i))

Possession
of Ephedrine, Pseudoephedrine, or Anhydrous Ammonia with intent to manufacture
methamphetamine (RCW 69.50.440)))

Promoting
Prostitution 1 (RCW 9A.88.070)

((Selling
for profit (controlled or counterfeit) any controlled substance (RCW 69.50.410)))

Theft
of Anhydrous Ammonia (RCW 69.55.010)

Vehicular
Homicide, by the operation of any vehicle in a reckless manner (RCW 46.61.520)

VIIBurglary
1 (RCW 9A.52.020)

Child
Molestation 2 (RCW 9A.44.086)

Dealing
in depictions of minor engaged in sexually explicit conduct (RCW 9.68A.050)

Drive-by
Shooting (RCW 9A.36.045)

Homicide
by Watercraft, by disregard for the safety of others (RCW 79A.60.050)

Indecent
Liberties (without forcible compulsion) (RCW 9A.44.100(1) (b) and (c))

Introducing
Contraband 1 (RCW 9A.76.140)

((Involving
a minor in drug dealing (RCW 69.50.401(f))))

Malicious
placement of an explosive 3 (RCW 70.74.270(3))

Sending,
bringing into state depictions of minor engaged in sexually explicit conduct
(RCW 9.68A.060)

Unlawful
Possession of a Firearm in the first degree (RCW 9.41.040(1)(a))

Use
of a Machine Gun in Commission of a Felony (RCW 9.41.225)

Vehicular
Homicide, by disregard for the safety of others (RCW 46.61.520)

VIBail
Jumping with Murder 1 (RCW 9A.76.170(3)(a))

Bribery
(RCW 9A.68.010)

Incest
1 (RCW 9A.64.020(1))

Intimidating
a Judge (RCW 9A.72.160)

Intimidating
a Juror/Witness (RCW 9A.72.110, 9A.72.130)

Malicious
placement of an imitation device 2 (RCW 70.74.272(1)(b))

((Manufacture,
deliver, or possess with intent to deliver narcotics from Schedule I or II
(except heroin or cocaine) or flunitrazepam from Schedule IV (RCW
69.50.401(a)(1)(i))))

Rape
of a Child 3 (RCW 9A.44.079)

Theft
of a Firearm (RCW 9A.56.300)

Unlawful
Storage of Anhydrous Ammonia (RCW 69.55.020)

VAbandonment
of dependent person 1 (RCW 9A.42.060)

Advancing
money or property for extortionate extension of credit (RCW 9A.82.030)

Bail
Jumping with class A Felony (RCW 9A.76.170(3)(b))

Child
Molestation 3 (RCW 9A.44.089)

Criminal
Mistreatment 1 (RCW 9A.42.020)

Custodial
Sexual Misconduct 1 (RCW 9A.44.160)

((Delivery
of imitation controlled substance by person eighteen or over to person under
eighteen (RCW 69.52.030(2))))

Domestic
Violence Court Order Violation (RCW 10.99.040, 10.99.050, 26.09.300, 26.10.220,
26.26.138, 26.50.110, 26.52.070, or 74.34.145)

Extortion
1 (RCW 9A.56.120)

Extortionate
Extension of Credit (RCW 9A.82.020)

Extortionate
Means to Collect Extensions of Credit (RCW 9A.82.040)

Incest
2 (RCW 9A.64.020(2))

Kidnapping
2 (RCW 9A.40.030)

Perjury
1 (RCW 9A.72.020)

Persistent
prison misbehavior (RCW 9.94.070)

Possession
of a Stolen Firearm (RCW 9A.56.310)

Rape
3 (RCW 9A.44.060)

Rendering
Criminal Assistance 1 (RCW 9A.76.070)

Sexual
Misconduct with a Minor 1 (RCW 9A.44.093)

Sexually
Violating Human Remains (RCW 9A.44.105)

Stalking
(RCW 9A.46.110)

IVArson
2 (RCW 9A.48.030)

Assault
2 (RCW 9A.36.021)

Assault
by Watercraft (RCW 79A.60.060)

Bribing
a Witness/Bribe Received by Witness (RCW 9A.72.090, 9A.72.100)

Commercial
Bribery (RCW 9A.68.060)

Counterfeiting
(RCW 9.16.035(4))

Escape
1 (RCW 9A.76.110)

Hit
and Run‑-Injury (RCW 46.52.020(4)(b))

Hit
and Run with Vessel‑-Injury Accident (RCW 79A.60.200(3))

Identity
Theft 1 (RCW 9.35.020(2)(a))

Indecent
Exposure to Person Under Age Fourteen (subsequent sex offense) (RCW 9A.88.010)

Influencing
Outcome of Sporting Event (RCW 9A.82.070)

Knowingly
Trafficking in Stolen Property (RCW 9A.82.050(2))

Malicious
Harassment (RCW 9A.36.080)

((Manufacture,
deliver, or possess with intent to deliver narcotics from Schedule III, IV, or
V or nonnarcotics from Schedule I-V (except marijuana, amphetamine,
methamphetamines, or flunitrazepam) (RCW 69.50.401(a)(1) (iii) through (v))))

Residential
Burglary (RCW 9A.52.025)

Robbery
2 (RCW 9A.56.210)

Theft
of Livestock 1 (RCW 9A.56.080)

Threats
to Bomb (RCW 9.61.160)

Use
of Proceeds of Criminal Profiteering (RCW 9A.82.080 (1) and (2))

Vehicular
Assault, by being under the influence of intoxicating liquor or any drug, or by
the operation or driving of a vehicle in a reckless manner (RCW 46.61.522)

Willful
Failure to Return from Furlough (RCW 72.66.060)

IIIAbandonment
of dependent person 2 (RCW 9A.42.070)

Assault
3 (RCW 9A.36.031)

Assault
of a Child 3 (RCW 9A.36.140)

Bail
Jumping with class B or C Felony (RCW 9A.76.170(3)(c))

Burglary
2 (RCW 9A.52.030)

Communication
with a Minor for Immoral Purposes (RCW 9.68A.090)

Criminal
Gang Intimidation (RCW 9A.46.120)

Criminal
Mistreatment 2 (RCW 9A.42.030)

Custodial
Assault (RCW 9A.36.100)

((Delivery
of a material in lieu of a controlled substance (RCW 69.50.401(c))))

Escape
2 (RCW 9A.76.120)

Extortion
2 (RCW 9A.56.130)

Harassment
(RCW 9A.46.020)

Intimidating
a Public Servant (RCW 9A.76.180)

Introducing
Contraband 2 (RCW 9A.76.150)

((Maintaining
a Dwelling or Place for Controlled Substances (RCW 69.50.402(a)(6))))

Malicious
Injury to Railroad Property (RCW 81.60.070)

((Manufacture,
deliver, or possess with intent to deliver marijuana (RCW 69.50.401(a)(1)(iii))

Manufacture,
distribute, or possess with intent to distribute an imitation controlled
substance (RCW 69.52.030(1))))

Patronizing
a Juvenile Prostitute (RCW 9.68A.100)

Perjury
2 (RCW 9A.72.030)

Possession
of Incendiary Device (RCW 9.40.120)

Possession
of Machine Gun or Short-Barreled Shotgun or Rifle (RCW 9.41.190)

Promoting
Prostitution 2 (RCW 9A.88.080)

Recklessly
Trafficking in Stolen Property (RCW 9A.82.050(1))

Securities
Act violation (RCW 21.20.400)

Tampering
with a Witness (RCW 9A.72.120)

Telephone
Harassment (subsequent conviction or threat of death) (RCW 9.61.230)

Theft
of Livestock 2 (RCW 9A.56.080)

Unlawful
Imprisonment (RCW 9A.40.040)

Unlawful
possession of firearm in the second degree (RCW 9.41.040(1)(b))

((Unlawful
Use of Building for Drug Purposes (RCW 69.53.010)))

Vehicular
Assault, by the operation or driving of a vehicle with disregard for the safety
of others (RCW 46.61.522)

Willful
Failure to Return from Work Release (RCW 72.65.070)

IIComputer
Trespass 1 (RCW 9A.52.110)

Counterfeiting
(RCW 9.16.035(3))

((Create,
deliver, or possess a counterfeit controlled substance (RCW 69.50.401(b))))

Escape
from Community Custody (RCW 72.09.310)

Health
Care False Claims (RCW 48.80.030)

Identity
Theft 2 (RCW 9.35.020(2)(b))

Improperly
Obtaining Financial Information (RCW 9.35.010)

Malicious
Mischief 1 (RCW 9A.48.070)

((Possession
of controlled substance that is either heroin or narcotics from Schedule I or
II or flunitrazepam from Schedule IV (RCW 69.50.401(d))

Possession
of phencyclidine (PCP) (RCW 69.50.401(d))))

Possession
of Stolen Property 1 (RCW 9A.56.150)

Theft
1 (RCW 9A.56.030)

Theft
of Rental, Leased, or Lease-purchased Property (valued at one thousand five
hundred dollars or more) (RCW 9A.56.096(4))

Trafficking
in Insurance Claims (RCW 48.30A.015)

Unlawful
Practice of Law (RCW 2.48.180)

Unlicensed
Practice of a Profession or Business (RCW 18.130.190(7))

IAttempting
to Elude a Pursuing Police Vehicle (RCW 46.61.024)

False
Verification for Welfare (RCW 74.08.055)

((Forged
Prescription (RCW 69.41.020)

Forged
Prescription for a Controlled Substance (RCW 69.50.403)))

Forgery
(RCW 9A.60.020)

Malicious
Mischief 2 (RCW 9A.48.080)

((Possess
Controlled Substance that is a Narcotic from Schedule III, IV, or V or
Non-narcotic from Schedule I-V (except phencyclidine or flunitrazepam) (RCW
69.50.401(d))))

Possession
of Stolen Property 2 (RCW 9A.56.160)

Reckless
Burning 1 (RCW 9A.48.040)

Taking
Motor Vehicle Without Permission (RCW 9A.56.070)

Theft
2 (RCW 9A.56.040)

Theft
of Rental, Leased, or Lease-purchased Property (valued at two hundred fifty
dollars or more but less than one thousand five hundred dollars) (RCW
9A.56.096(4))

Unlawful
Issuance of Checks or Drafts (RCW 9A.56.060)

Unlawful
Use of Food Stamps (RCW 9.91.140 (2) and (3))

Vehicle
Prowl 1 (RCW 9A.52.095)

NEW SECTION. Sec.
8. A new section is added
to chapter 9.94A RCW to read as follows:

(1) TABLE
3

DRUG
OFFENSE SENTENCING GRID

Seriousness Offender Score Offender Score Offender
Score

Level 0 to 2 3 to 5 6
to 9 or more

III 51 to 68 months 68+
to 100 months 100+ to 120 months

II 12+ to 20 months 20+
to 60 months 60+ to 120 months

I 0 to 6 months 6+
to 18 months 12+ to 24 months

References to months
represent the standard sentence ranges. 12+ equals one year and one day.

(2) The court may utilize
any other sanctions or alternatives as authorized by law, including but not
limited to the special drug offender sentencing alternative under RCW 9.94A.660
or drug court under RCW 2.28.170.

(3) Nothing in this
section creates an entitlement for a criminal defendant to any specific
sanction, alternative, sentence option, or substance abuse treatment.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
9. A new section is added
to chapter 9.94A RCW to read as follows:

TABLE
4

DRUG
OFFENSES INCLUDED WITHIN EACH SERIOUSNESS LEVEL

IIIAny
felony offense under chapter 69.50 RCW with a deadly weapon special verdict
under RCW 9.94A.602

Controlled
Substance Homicide (RCW 69.50.415)

Delivery
of imitation controlled substance by person eighteen or over to person under
eighteen (RCW 69.52.030(2))

Involving
a minor in drug dealing (RCW 69.50.401(f))

Manufacture
of methamphetamine (RCW 69.50.401(a)(1)(ii))

Over
18 and deliver heroin, methamphetamine, a narcotic from Schedule I or II, or
flunitrazepam from Schedule IV to someone under 18 (RCW 69.50.406)

Over
18 and deliver narcotic from Schedule III, IV, or V or a nonnarcotic, except
flunitrazepam or methamphetamine, from Schedule I-V to someone under 18 and 3
years junior (RCW 69.50.406)

Possession
of Ephedrine, Pseudoephedrine, or Anhydrous Ammonia with intent to manufacture
methamphetamine (RCW 69.50.440)

Selling
for profit (controlled or counterfeit) any controlled substance (RCW 69.50.410)

IICreate,
deliver, or possess a counterfeit controlled substance (RCW 69.50.401(b))

Deliver
or possess with intent to deliver methamphetamine (RCW 69.50.401(a)(1)(ii))

Delivery
of a material in lieu of a controlled substance (RCW 69.50.401(c))

Maintaining
a Dwelling or Place for Controlled Substances (RCW 69.50.402(a)(6))

Manufacture,
deliver, or possess with intent to deliver amphetamine (RCW
69.50.401(a)(1)(ii))

Manufacture,
deliver, or possess with intent to deliver narcotics from Schedule I or II or
flunitrazepam from Schedule IV (RCW 69.50.401(a)(1)(i))

Manufacture,
deliver, or possess with intent to deliver narcotics from Schedule III, IV, or
V or nonnarcotics from Schedule I-V (except marijuana, amphetamine,
methamphetamines, or flunitrazepam) (RCW 69.50.401(a)(1) (iii) through (v))

Manufacture,
distribute, or possess with intent to distribute an imitation controlled
substance (RCW 69.52.030(1))

IForged
Prescription (RCW 69.41.020)

Forged
Prescription for a Controlled Substance (RCW 69.50.403)

Manufacture,
deliver, or possess with intent to deliver marijuana (RCW 69.50.401(a)(1)(iii))

Possess
Controlled Substance that is a Narcotic from Schedule III, IV, or V or
Non-narcotic from Schedule I-V (RCW 69.50.401(d))

Possession
of Controlled Substance that is either heroin or narcotics from Schedule I or
II (RCW 69.50.401(d))

Unlawful
Use of Building for Drug Purposes (RCW 69.53.010)

Sec. 10. RCW 9.94A.510 and 2000 c
132 s 2 and 2000 c 28 s 11 are each reenacted and amended to read as follows:

(((1))) TABLE
1

Sentencing
Grid

SERIOUSNESS

LEVEL OFFENDER SCORE

9
or

0 1 2 3 4 5 6 7 8 more

XVI Life Sentence without Parole/Death Penalty

XV 23y4m 24y4m 25y4m 26y4m 27y4m 28y4m 30y4m 32y10m 36y 40y

240- 250- 261- 271- 281- 291- 312- 338- 370- 411-

320 333 347 361 374 388 416 450 493 548

XIV 14y4m 15y4m 16y2m 17y 17y11m 18y9m 20y5m 22y2m 25y7m 29y

123- 134- 144- 154- 165- 175- 195- 216- 257- 298-

220 234 244 254 265 275 295 316 357 397

XIII 12y 13y 14y 15y 16y 17y 19y 21y 25y 29y

123- 134- 144- 154- 165- 175- 195- 216- 257- 298-

164 178 192 205 219 233 260 288 342 397

XII 9y 9y11m 10y9m 11y8m 12y6m 13y5m 15y9m 17y3m 20y3m 23y3m

93- 102- 111- 120- 129- 138- 162- 178- 209- 240-

123 136 147 160 171 184 216 236 277
318

XI 7y6m 8y4m 9y2m 9y11m 10y9m 11y7m 14y2m 15y5m 17y11m 20y5m

78- 86- 95- 102- 111- 120- 146- 159- 185- 210-

102 114 125 136 147 158 194 211 245
280

X 5y 5y6m 6y 6y6m 7y 7y6m 9y6m 10y6m 12y6m 14y6m

51- 57- 62- 67- 72- 77- 98- 108- 129- 149-

68 75 82 89 96 102 130 144 171 198

IX 3y 3y6m 4y 4y6m 5y 5y6m 7y6m 8y6m 10y6m 12y6m

31- 36- 41- 46- 51- 57- 77- 87- 108- 129-

41 48 54 61 68 75 102 116 144 171

VIII 2y 2y6m 3y 3y6m 4y 4y6m 6y6m 7y6m 8y6m 10y6m

21- 26- 31- 36- 41- 46- 67- 77- 87- 108-

27 34 41 48 54 61 89 102 116 144

VII 18m 2y 2y6m 3y 3y6m 4y 5y6m 6y6m 7y6m 8y6m

15- 21- 26- 31- 36- 41- 57- 67- 77- 87-

20 27 34 41 48 54 75 89 102 116

VI 13m 18m 2y 2y6m 3y 3y6m 4y6m 5y6m 6y6m 7y6m

12+- 15- 21- 26- 31- 36- 46- 57- 67- 77-

14 20 27 34 41 48 61 75 89 102

V 9m 13m 15m 18m 2y2m 3y2m 4y 5y 6y 7y

6- 12+- 13- 15- 22- 33- 41- 51- 62- 72-

12 14 17 20 29 43 54 68 82 96

IV 6m 9m 13m 15m 18m 2y2m 3y2m 4y2m 5y2m 6y2m

3- 6- 12+- 13- 15- 22- 33- 43- 53- 63-

9 12 14 17 20 29 43 57 70 84

III 2m 5m 8m 11m 14m 20m 2y2m 3y2m 4y2m 5y

1- 3- 4- 9- 12+- 17- 22- 33- 43- 51-

3 8 12 12 16 22 29 43 57 68

II 4m 6m 8m 13m 16m 20m 2y2m 3y2m 4y2m

0-90 2- 3- 4- 12+- 14- 17- 22- 33- 43-

Days 6 9 12 14 18 22 29 43 57

I 3m 4m 5m 8m 13m 16m 20m 2y2m

0-60 0-90 2- 2- 3- 4- 12+- 14- 17- 22-

Days Days 5 6 8 12 14 18 22 29

Numbers in the first horizontal
row of each seriousness category represent sentencing midpoints in years(y) and
months(m). Numbers in the second and third rows represent standard sentence
ranges in months, or in days if so designated. 12+ equals one year and one
day.

(((2) For persons
convicted of the anticipatory offenses of criminal attempt, solicitation, or
conspiracy under chapter 9A.28 RCW, the standard sentence range is determined
by locating the sentencing grid sentence range defined by the appropriate
offender score and the seriousness level of the completed crime, and
multiplying the range by 75 percent.

(3) The following
additional times shall be added to the standard sentence range for felony
crimes committed after July 23, 1995, if the offender or an accomplice was
armed with a firearm as defined in RCW 9.41.010 and the offender is being
sentenced for one of the crimes listed in this subsection as eligible for any
firearm enhancements based on the classification of the completed felony
crime. If the offender is being sentenced for more than one offense, the
firearm enhancement or enhancements must be added to the total period of
confinement for all offenses, regardless of which underlying offense is subject
to a firearm enhancement. If the offender or an accomplice was armed with a
firearm as defined in RCW 9.41.010 and the offender is being sentenced for an
anticipatory offense under chapter 9A.28 RCW to commit one of the crimes listed
in this subsection as eligible for any firearm enhancements, the following additional
times shall be added to the standard sentence range determined under subsection
(2) of this section based on the felony crime of conviction as classified under
RCW 9A.28.020:

(a) Five years for
any felony defined under any law as a class A felony or with a statutory
maximum sentence of at least twenty years, or both, and not covered under (f)
of this subsection.

(b) Three years for
any felony defined under any law as a class B felony or with a statutory
maximum sentence of ten years, or both, and not covered under (f) of this
subsection.

(c) Eighteen months
for any felony defined under any law as a class C felony or with a statutory
maximum sentence of five years, or both, and not covered under (f) of this
subsection.

(d) If the offender
is being sentenced for any firearm enhancements under (a), (b), and/or (c) of
this subsection and the offender has previously been sentenced for any deadly
weapon enhancements after July 23, 1995, under (a), (b), and/or (c) of this
subsection or subsection (4)(a), (b), and/or (c) of this section, or both, all
firearm enhancements under this subsection shall be twice the amount of the
enhancement listed.

(e) Notwithstanding
any other provision of law, all firearm enhancements under this section are
mandatory, shall be served in total confinement, and shall run consecutively to
all other sentencing provisions, including other firearm or deadly weapon
enhancements, for all offenses sentenced under this chapter. However, whether
or not a mandatory minimum term has expired, an offender serving a sentence
under this subsection may be granted an extraordinary medical placement when
authorized under RCW 9.94A.728(4).

(f) The firearm
enhancements in this section shall apply to all felony crimes except the
following: Possession of a machine gun, possessing a stolen firearm, drive-by
shooting, theft of a firearm, unlawful possession of a firearm in the first and
second degree, and use of a machine gun in a felony.

(g) If the standard
sentence range under this section exceeds the statutory maximum sentence for
the offense, the statutory maximum sentence shall be the presumptive sentence
unless the offender is a persistent offender. If the addition of a firearm
enhancement increases the sentence so that it would exceed the statutory
maximum for the offense, the portion of the sentence representing the
enhancement may not be reduced.

(4) The following
additional times shall be added to the standard sentence range for felony
crimes committed after July 23, 1995, if the offender or an accomplice was
armed with a deadly weapon other than a firearm as defined in RCW 9.41.010 and
the offender is being sentenced for one of the crimes listed in this subsection
as eligible for any deadly weapon enhancements based on the classification of
the completed felony crime. If the offender is being sentenced for more than
one offense, the deadly weapon enhancement or enhancements must be added to the
total period of confinement for all offenses, regardless of which underlying
offense is subject to a deadly weapon enhancement. If the offender or an
accomplice was armed with a deadly weapon other than a firearm as defined in
RCW 9.41.010 and the offender is being sentenced for an anticipatory offense
under chapter 9A.28 RCW to commit one of the crimes listed in this subsection
as eligible for any deadly weapon enhancements, the following additional times
shall be added to the standard sentence range determined under subsection (2)
of this section based on the felony crime of conviction as classified under RCW
9A.28.020:

(a) Two years for
any felony defined under any law as a class A felony or with a statutory
maximum sentence of at least twenty years, or both, and not covered under (f)
of this subsection.

(b) One year for any
felony defined under any law as a class B felony or with a statutory maximum
sentence of ten years, or both, and not covered under (f) of this subsection.

(c) Six months for
any felony defined under any law as a class C felony or with a statutory
maximum sentence of five years, or both, and not covered under (f) of this
subsection.

(d) If the offender
is being sentenced under (a), (b), and/or (c) of this subsection for any deadly
weapon enhancements and the offender has previously been sentenced for any
deadly weapon enhancements after July 23, 1995, under (a), (b), and/or (c) of
this subsection or subsection (3)(a), (b), and/or (c) of this section, or both,
all deadly weapon enhancements under this subsection shall be twice the amount
of the enhancement listed.

(e) Notwithstanding
any other provision of law, all deadly weapon enhancements under this section
are mandatory, shall be served in total confinement, and shall run
consecutively to all other sentencing provisions, including other firearm or
deadly weapon enhancements, for all offenses sentenced under this chapter.
However, whether or not a mandatory minimum term has expired, an offender
serving a sentence under this subsection may be granted an extraordinary
medical placement when authorized under RCW 9.94A.728(4).

(f) The deadly
weapon enhancements in this section shall apply to all felony crimes except the
following: Possession of a machine gun, possessing a stolen firearm, drive-by
shooting, theft of a firearm, unlawful possession of a firearm in the first and
second degree, and use of a machine gun in a felony.

(g) If the standard
sentence range under this section exceeds the statutory maximum sentence for
the offense, the statutory maximum sentence shall be the presumptive sentence
unless the offender is a persistent offender. If the addition of a deadly
weapon enhancement increases the sentence so that it would exceed the statutory
maximum for the offense, the portion of the sentence representing the
enhancement may not be reduced.

(5) The following
additional times shall be added to the standard sentence range if the offender
or an accomplice committed the offense while in a county jail or state
correctional facility and the offender is being sentenced for one of the crimes
listed in this subsection. If the offender or an accomplice committed one of
the crimes listed in this subsection while in a county jail or state
correctional facility, and the offender is being sentenced for an anticipatory
offense under chapter 9A.28 RCW to commit one of the crimes listed in this
subsection, the following additional times shall be added to the standard
sentence range determined under subsection (2) of this section:

(a) Eighteen months
for offenses committed under RCW 69.50.401(a)(1) (i) or (ii) or 69.50.410;

(b) Fifteen months
for offenses committed under RCW 69.50.401(a)(1) (iii), (iv), and (v);

(c) Twelve months
for offenses committed under RCW 69.50.401(d).

For the purposes of
this subsection, all of the real property of a state correctional facility or
county jail shall be deemed to be part of that facility or county jail.

(6) An additional
twenty-four months shall be added to the standard sentence range for any ranked
offense involving a violation of chapter 69.50 RCW if the offense was also a
violation of RCW 69.50.435 or 9.94A.605.

(7) An additional
two years shall be added to the standard sentence range for vehicular homicide
committed while under the influence of intoxicating liquor or any drug as
defined by RCW 46.61.502 for each prior offense as defined in RCW 46.61.5055.))

NEW SECTION. Sec.
11. A new section is added
to chapter 9.94A RCW to read as follows:

(1) The provisions of
this section apply to the standard sentence ranges determined by RCW 9.94A.510
or section 8 of this act.

(2) For persons
convicted of the anticipatory offenses of criminal attempt, solicitation, or
conspiracy under chapter 9A.28 RCW, the standard sentence range is determined
by locating the sentencing grid sentence range defined by the appropriate
offender score and the seriousness level of the completed crime, and
multiplying the range by seventy-five percent.

(3) The following additional
times shall be added to the standard sentence range for felony crimes committed
after July 23, 1995, if the offender or an accomplice was armed with a firearm
as defined in RCW 9.41.010 and the offender is being sentenced for one of the
crimes listed in this subsection as eligible for any firearm enhancements based
on the classification of the completed felony crime. If the offender is being
sentenced for more than one offense, the firearm enhancement or enhancements
must be added to the total period of confinement for all offenses, regardless
of which underlying offense is subject to a firearm enhancement. If the
offender or an accomplice was armed with a firearm as defined in RCW 9.41.010
and the offender is being sentenced for an anticipatory offense under chapter
9A.28 RCW to commit one of the crimes listed in this subsection as eligible for
any firearm enhancements, the following additional times shall be added to the
standard sentence range determined under subsection (2) of this section based on
the felony crime of conviction as classified under RCW 9A.28.020:

(a) Five years for any
felony defined under any law as a class A felony or with a statutory maximum
sentence of at least twenty years, or both, and not covered under (f) of this
subsection;

(b) Three years for any
felony defined under any law as a class B felony or with a statutory maximum
sentence of ten years, or both, and not covered under (f) of this subsection;

(c) Eighteen months for
any felony defined under any law as a class C felony or with a statutory
maximum sentence of five years, or both, and not covered under (f) of this
subsection;

(d) If the offender is
being sentenced for any firearm enhancements under (a), (b), and/or (c) of this
subsection and the offender has previously been sentenced for any deadly weapon
enhancements after July 23, 1995, under (a), (b), and/or (c) of this subsection
or subsection (4)(a), (b), and/or (c) of this section, or both, all firearm
enhancements under this subsection shall be twice the amount of the enhancement
listed;

(e) Notwithstanding any
other provision of law, all firearm enhancements under this section are
mandatory, shall be served in total confinement, and shall run consecutively to
all other sentencing provisions, including other firearm or deadly weapon
enhancements, for all offenses sentenced under this chapter. However, whether
or not a mandatory minimum term has expired, an offender serving a sentence
under this subsection may be granted an extraordinary medical placement when authorized
under RCW 9.94A.728(4);

(f) The firearm
enhancements in this section shall apply to all felony crimes except the
following: Possession of a machine gun, possessing a stolen firearm, drive-by
shooting, theft of a firearm, unlawful possession of a firearm in the first and
second degree, and use of a machine gun in a felony;

(g) If the standard
sentence range under this section exceeds the statutory maximum sentence for
the offense, the statutory maximum sentence shall be the presumptive sentence
unless the offender is a persistent offender. If the addition of a firearm
enhancement increases the sentence so that it would exceed the statutory
maximum for the offense, the portion of the sentence representing the
enhancement may not be reduced.

(4) The following
additional times shall be added to the standard sentence range for felony
crimes committed after July 23, 1995, if the offender or an accomplice was
armed with a deadly weapon other than a firearm as defined in RCW 9.41.010 and
the offender is being sentenced for one of the crimes listed in this subsection
as eligible for any deadly weapon enhancements based on the classification of
the completed felony crime. If the offender is being sentenced for more than
one offense, the deadly weapon enhancement or enhancements must be added to the
total period of confinement for all offenses, regardless of which underlying
offense is subject to a deadly weapon enhancement. If the offender or an
accomplice was armed with a deadly weapon other than a firearm as defined in
RCW 9.41.010 and the offender is being sentenced for an anticipatory offense
under chapter 9A.28 RCW to commit one of the crimes listed in this subsection
as eligible for any deadly weapon enhancements, the following additional times
shall be added to the standard sentence range determined under subsection (2)
of this section based on the felony crime of conviction as classified under RCW
9A.28.020:

(a) Two years for any
felony defined under any law as a class A felony or with a statutory maximum
sentence of at least twenty years, or both, and not covered under (f) of this
subsection;

(b) One year for any
felony defined under any law as a class B felony or with a statutory maximum
sentence of ten years, or both, and not covered under (f) of this subsection;

(c) Six months for any
felony defined under any law as a class C felony or with a statutory maximum
sentence of five years, or both, and not covered under (f) of this subsection;

(d) If the offender is
being sentenced under (a), (b), and/or (c) of this subsection for any deadly
weapon enhancements and the offender has previously been sentenced for any
deadly weapon enhancements after July 23, 1995, under (a), (b), and/or (c) of
this subsection or subsection (3)(a), (b), and/or (c) of this section, or both,
all deadly weapon enhancements under this subsection shall be twice the amount
of the enhancement listed;

(e) Notwithstanding any
other provision of law, all deadly weapon enhancements under this section are
mandatory, shall be served in total confinement, and shall run consecutively to
all other sentencing provisions, including other firearm or deadly weapon
enhancements, for all offenses sentenced under this chapter. However, whether
or not a mandatory minimum term has expired, an offender serving a sentence
under this subsection may be granted an extraordinary medical placement when
authorized under RCW 9.94A.728(4);

(f) The deadly weapon
enhancements in this section shall apply to all felony crimes except the
following: Possession of a machine gun, possessing a stolen firearm, drive-by
shooting, theft of a firearm, unlawful possession of a firearm in the first and
second degree, and use of a machine gun in a felony;

(g) If the standard
sentence range under this section exceeds the statutory maximum sentence for
the offense, the statutory maximum sentence shall be the presumptive sentence
unless the offender is a persistent offender. If the addition of a deadly
weapon enhancement increases the sentence so that it would exceed the statutory
maximum for the offense, the portion of the sentence representing the
enhancement may not be reduced.

(5) The following
additional times shall be added to the standard sentence range if the offender
or an accomplice committed the offense while in a county jail or state
correctional facility and the offender is being sentenced for one of the crimes
listed in this subsection. If the offender or an accomplice committed one of
the crimes listed in this subsection while in a county jail or state correctional
facility, and the offender is being sentenced for an anticipatory offense under
chapter 9A.28 RCW to commit one of the crimes listed in this subsection, the
following additional times shall be added to the standard sentence range
determined under subsection (2) of this section:

(a) Eighteen months for
offenses committed under RCW 69.50.401(a)(1) (i) or (ii) or 69.50.410;

(b) Fifteen months for
offenses committed under RCW 69.50.401(a)(1) (iii), (iv), and (v);

(c) Twelve months for
offenses committed under RCW 69.50.401(d).

For the purposes of
this subsection, all of the real property of a state correctional facility or
county jail shall be deemed to be part of that facility or county jail.

(6) An additional
twenty-four months shall be added to the standard sentence range for any ranked
offense involving a violation of chapter 69.50 RCW if the offense was also a
violation of RCW 69.50.435 or 9.94A.605.

(7) An additional two
years shall be added to the standard sentence range for vehicular homicide
committed while under the influence of intoxicating liquor or any drug as
defined by RCW 46.61.502 for each prior offense as defined in RCW 46.61.5055.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
12. (1) A joint select
committee on the drug offense sentencing grid is established.

(2) The committee shall
consist of the following persons:

(a) One member from
each of the two largest caucuses of the senate, appointed by the president of
the senate;

(b) One member from
each of the two largest caucuses of the house of representatives, appointed by
the speaker of the house;

(c) A superior court
judge, selected by the superior court judges association;

(d) A prosecuting
attorney, selected by the Washington association of prosecuting attorneys;

(e) A member selected
by the Washington state bar association, whose practice includes a significant
amount of time devoted to criminal defense work;

(f) An elected sheriff
or a police chief, selected by the Washington association of sheriffs and
police chiefs;

(g) A representative
from the division of alcohol and substance abuse in the department of social
and health services;

(h) A member of the
sentencing guidelines commission;

(i) A member of the
caseload forecast council;

(j) A representative
from the governor's office of financial management;

(k) A representative
from the department of corrections;

(l) A representative
from the Washington state association of counties;

(m) A chemical
dependency treatment provider; and

(n) A representative
from the Washington state association of drug court professionals.

(3) The chair and
vice-chair of the committee shall be chosen by the members of the committee.

(4) The committee shall
review and make recommendations to the legislature and governor regarding the
drug offense sentencing grid created pursuant to section 8 of this act. In
preparing the recommendations, the committee shall:

(a) Establish a
methodology of determining the fiscal consequences to the state and local
governments, including the calculation of savings to be dedicated to substance
abuse treatment, resulting from the implementation of the grid and any
recommended revisions to the grid;

(b) Review and recommend
any changes in the sentencing levels and penalties in the drug sentencing grid;

(c) Consider the
proportionality of sentencing based on the quantity of controlled substances;

(d) Examine methods for
addressing issues of racial disproportionality in sentencing;

(e) Recommend a
statewide method of evaluating the success of drug courts in terms of reducing
recidivism and increasing the number of persons who participate in drug court
programs and remain free of substance abuse;

(f) Review and make any
appropriate revisions in statewide criteria for funding substance abuse
treatment programs for defendants and offenders; and

(g) Review and make any
recommendations for changes in the method of distribution of funding methods
established in this act for defendant and offender drug treatment programs.

(5) The committee shall
complete its review and submit its recommendations to the legislature and
governor not later than June 1, 2003.

(6) The staff of the
legislature, the sentencing guidelines commission, and the caseload forecast
council shall provide support to the committee.

(7) Nonlegislative
members of the committee shall serve without compensation, but shall be
reimbursed for travel expenses as provided in RCW 43.03.050 and 43.03.060.
Legislative members of the committee shall be reimbursed for travel expenses as
provided in RCW 44.04.120.

(8) This section
expires December 31, 2003.

Sec. 13. RCW 2.28.170 and 1999 c
197 s 9 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) Counties may
establish and operate drug courts.

(2) For the purposes of
this section, "drug court" means a court that has special calendars
or dockets designed to achieve a reduction in recidivism and substance abuse
among nonviolent, substance abusing offenders by increasing their likelihood
for successful rehabilitation through early, continuous, and intense judicially
supervised treatment; mandatory periodic drug testing; and the use of
appropriate sanctions and other rehabilitation services.

(3)(a) Any
jurisdiction that seeks a state appropriation to fund a drug court program must
first:

(((a))) (i)
Exhaust all federal funding received from the office of national drug control policy
that is available to support the operations of its drug court and associated
services; and

(((b))) (ii)
Match, on a dollar-for-dollar basis, state moneys allocated for drug court
programs with local cash or in-kind resources. Moneys allocated by the
state must be used to supplement, not supplant, other federal, state, and local
funds for drug court operations and associated services.

(b) Any county that
establishes a drug court pursuant to this section shall establish minimum
requirements for the participation of offenders in the program. The drug court
may adopt local requirements that are more stringent than the minimum. The
minimum requirements are:

(i) The offender
would benefit from substance abuse treatment;

(ii) The offender
has not previously been convicted of a serious violent offense or sex offense
as defined in RCW 9.94A.030; and

(iii) Without regard
to whether proof of any of these elements is required to convict, the offender
is not currently charged with or convicted of an offense:

(A) That is a sex
offense;

(B) That is a
serious violent offense;

(C) During which the
defendant used a firearm; or

(D) During which the
defendant caused substantial or great bodily harm or death to another person.

(4) If a court finds
that the offender meets the criteria for entry into drug court, the court on
its own motion, or the motion of the state or the offender, may admit the
defendant into drug court. The decision to admit or deny entry into a drug
court program is not appealable.

Sec. 14. RCW 9.94A.470 and 1995 c
129 s 4 are each amended to read as follows:

Notwithstanding the
current placement or listing of crimes in categories or classifications of
prosecuting standards for deciding to prosecute under RCW 9.94A.411(2), any and
all felony crimes involving any deadly weapon special verdict under RCW
9.94A.602, any deadly weapon enhancements under ((RCW 9.94A.510)) section
11 (3) or (4) of this act, or both, and any and all felony crimes as
defined in ((RCW 9.94A.510)) section 11 (3)(f) or (4)(f) of
this act, or both, which are excluded from the deadly weapon enhancements
shall all be treated as crimes against a person and subject to the prosecuting
standards for deciding to prosecute under RCW 9.94A.411(2) as crimes against
persons.

Sec. 15. RCW 9.94A.475 and 1997 c
338 s 48 are each amended to read as follows:

Any and all recommended
sentencing agreements or plea agreements and the sentences for any and all
felony crimes shall be made and retained as public records if the felony crime
involves:

(1) Any violent offense
as defined in this chapter;

(2) Any most serious
offense as defined in this chapter;

(3) Any felony with a
deadly weapon special verdict under RCW 9.94A.602;

(4) Any felony with any
deadly weapon enhancements under ((RCW 9.94A.510)) section 11 (3)
or (4) of this act, or both; and/or

(5) The felony crimes
of possession of a machine gun, possessing a stolen firearm, drive-by shooting,
theft of a firearm, unlawful possession of a firearm in the first or second
degree, and/or use of a machine gun in a felony.

Sec. 16. RCW 9.94A.480 and 1997 c
338 s 49 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) A current, newly
created or reworked judgment and sentence document for each felony sentencing
shall record any and all recommended sentencing agreements or plea agreements
and the sentences for any and all felony crimes kept as public records under
RCW 9.94A.475 shall contain the clearly printed name and legal signature of the
sentencing judge. The judgment and sentence document as defined in this
section shall also provide additional space for the sentencing judge's reasons
for going either above or below the presumptive sentence range for any and all
felony crimes covered as public records under RCW 9.94A.475. Both the
sentencing judge and the prosecuting attorney's office shall each retain or
receive a completed copy of each sentencing document as defined in this section
for their own records.

(2) The sentencing
guidelines commission shall be sent a completed copy of the judgment and
sentence document upon conviction for each felony sentencing under subsection
(1) of this section and shall compile a yearly and cumulative judicial record
of each sentencing judge in regards to his or her sentencing practices for any
and all felony crimes involving:

(a) Any violent offense
as defined in this chapter;

(b) Any most serious
offense as defined in this chapter;

(c) Any felony with any
deadly weapon special verdict under RCW 9.94A.602;

(d) Any felony with any
deadly weapon enhancements under ((RCW 9.94A.510)) section 11 (3)
or (4) of this act, or both; and/or

(e) The felony crimes
of possession of a machine gun, possessing a stolen firearm, drive‑by
shooting, theft of a firearm, unlawful possession of a firearm in the first or
second degree, and/or use of a machine gun in a felony.

(3) The sentencing
guidelines commission shall compare each individual judge's sentencing
practices to the standard or presumptive sentence range for any and all felony
crimes listed in subsection (2) of this section for the appropriate offense
level as defined in RCW 9.94A.515 or section 9 of this act, offender
score as defined in RCW 9.94A.525, and any applicable deadly weapon
enhancements as defined in ((RCW 9.94A.510)) section 11 (3) or
(4) of this act, or both. These comparative records shall be retained
and made available to the public for review in a current, newly created or
reworked official published document by the sentencing guidelines commission.

(4) Any and all felony
sentences which are either above or below the standard or presumptive sentence
range in subsection (3) of this section shall also mark whether the prosecuting
attorney in the case also recommended a similar sentence, if any, which was
either above or below the presumptive sentence range and shall also indicate if
the sentence was in conjunction with an approved alternative sentencing option
including a first-time offender waiver, sex offender sentencing alternative, or
other prescribed sentencing option.

(5) If any completed
judgment and sentence document as defined in subsection (1) of this section is
not sent to the sentencing guidelines commission as required in subsection (2)
of this section, the sentencing guidelines commission shall have the authority
and shall undertake reasonable and necessary steps to assure that all past,
current, and future sentencing documents as defined in subsection (1) of this
section are received by the sentencing guidelines commission.

Sec. 17. RCW 9.94A.505 and 2001 2nd
sp.s. c 12 s 312 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) When a person is
convicted of a felony, the court shall impose punishment as provided in this
chapter.

(2)(a) The court shall
impose a sentence as provided in the following sections and as applicable in
the case:

(i) Unless another term
of confinement applies, the court shall impose a sentence within the standard
sentence range established in RCW 9.94A.510 or section 8 of this act;

(ii) RCW 9.94A.700 and
9.94A.705, relating to community placement;

(iii) RCW 9.94A.710 and
9.94A.715, relating to community custody;

(iv) RCW 9.94A.545,
relating to community custody for offenders whose term of confinement is one
year or less;

(v) RCW 9.94A.570,
relating to persistent offenders;

(vi) RCW 9.94A.540,
relating to mandatory minimum terms;

(vii) RCW 9.94A.650,
relating to the first-time offender waiver;

(viii) RCW 9.94A.660,
relating to the drug offender sentencing alternative;

(ix) RCW 9.94A.670,
relating to the special sex offender sentencing alternative;

(x) RCW 9.94A.712,
relating to certain sex offenses;

(xi) RCW 9.94A.535,
relating to exceptional sentences;

(xii) RCW 9.94A.589,
relating to consecutive and concurrent sentences.

(b) If a standard
sentence range has not been established for the offender's crime, the court
shall impose a determinate sentence which may include not more than one year of
confinement; community service work; until July 1, 2000, a term of community
supervision not to exceed one year and on and after July 1, 2000, a term of
community custody not to exceed one year, subject to conditions and sanctions
as authorized in RCW 9.94A.710 (2) and (3); and/or other legal financial
obligations. The court may impose a sentence which provides more than one year
of confinement if the court finds reasons justifying an exceptional sentence as
provided in RCW 9.94A.535.

(3) If the court
imposes a sentence requiring confinement of thirty days or less, the court may,
in its discretion, specify that the sentence be served on consecutive or
intermittent days. A sentence requiring more than thirty days of confinement
shall be served on consecutive days. Local jail administrators may schedule
court-ordered intermittent sentences as space permits.

(4) If a sentence
imposed includes payment of a legal financial obligation, it shall be imposed
as provided in RCW 9.94A.750, 9.94A.753, and 9.94A.760.

(5) Except as provided
under RCW 9.94A.750(4) and 9.94A.753(4), a court may not impose a sentence
providing for a term of confinement or community supervision, community
placement, or community custody which exceeds the statutory maximum for the
crime as provided in chapter 9A.20 RCW.

(6) The sentencing
court shall give the offender credit for all confinement time served before the
sentencing if that confinement was solely in regard to the offense for which
the offender is being sentenced.

(7) The court shall
order restitution as provided in RCW 9.94A.750 and 9.94A.753.

(8) As a part of any
sentence, the court may impose and enforce crime-related prohibitions and
affirmative conditions as provided in this chapter.

(9) The court may order
an offender whose sentence includes community placement or community
supervision to undergo a mental status evaluation and to participate in
available outpatient mental health treatment, if the court finds that
reasonable grounds exist to believe that the offender is a mentally ill person
as defined in RCW 71.24.025, and that this condition is likely to have
influenced the offense. An order requiring mental status evaluation or
treatment must be based on a presentence report and, if applicable, mental
status evaluations that have been filed with the court to determine the
offender's competency or eligibility for a defense of insanity. The court may
order additional evaluations at a later date if deemed appropriate.

(10) In any sentence of
partial confinement, the court may require the offender to serve the partial
confinement in work release, in a program of home detention, on work crew, or
in a combined program of work crew and home detention.

(11) In sentencing an
offender convicted of a crime of domestic violence, as defined in RCW
10.99.020, if the offender has a minor child, or if the victim of the offense
for which the offender was convicted has a minor child, the court may, as part
of any term of community supervision, community placement, or community
custody, order the offender to participate in a domestic violence perpetrator
program approved under RCW 26.50.150.

Sec. 18. RCW 9.94A.530 and 2000 c
28 s 12 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) The intersection of
the column defined by the offender score and the row defined by the offense
seriousness score determines the standard sentence range (see RCW 9.94A.510,
(Table 1) and section 8 of this act, (Table 3)). The additional time
for deadly weapon findings or for those offenses enumerated in ((RCW
9.94A.510)) section 11(4) of this act that were committed in
a state correctional facility or county jail shall be added to the entire
standard sentence range. The court may impose any sentence within the range
that it deems appropriate. All standard sentence ranges are expressed in terms
of total confinement.

(2) In determining any
sentence, the trial court may rely on no more information than is admitted by
the plea agreement, or admitted, acknowledged, or proved in a trial or at the
time of sentencing. Acknowledgement includes not objecting to information
stated in the presentence reports. Where the defendant disputes material
facts, the court must either not consider the fact or grant an evidentiary
hearing on the point. The facts shall be deemed proved at the hearing by a
preponderance of the evidence. Facts that establish the elements of a more
serious crime or additional crimes may not be used to go outside the standard
sentence range except upon stipulation or when specifically provided for in RCW
9.94A.535(2) (d), (e), (g), and (h).

Sec. 19. RCW 9.94A.585 and 2000 c
28 s 10 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) A sentence within
the standard sentence range, under RCW 9.94A.510 or section 8 of this act,
for ((the)) an offense shall not be appealed. For purposes of
this section, a sentence imposed on a first-time offender under RCW 9.94A.650
shall also be deemed to be within the standard sentence range for the offense
and shall not be appealed.

(2) A sentence outside
the standard sentence range for the offense is subject to appeal by the
defendant or the state. The appeal shall be to the court of appeals in
accordance with rules adopted by the supreme court.

(3) Pending review of
the sentence, the sentencing court or the court of appeals may order the defendant
confined or placed on conditional release, including bond.

(4) To reverse a
sentence which is outside the standard sentence range, the reviewing court must
find: (a) Either that the reasons supplied by the sentencing court are not
supported by the record which was before the judge or that those reasons do not
justify a sentence outside the standard sentence range for that offense; or (b)
that the sentence imposed was clearly excessive or clearly too lenient.

(5) A review under this
section shall be made solely upon the record that was before the sentencing
court. Written briefs shall not be required and the review and decision shall
be made in an expedited manner according to rules adopted by the supreme court.

(6) The court of
appeals shall issue a written opinion in support of its decision whenever the
judgment of the sentencing court is reversed and may issue written opinions in
any other case where the court believes that a written opinion would provide
guidance to sentencing courts and others in implementing this chapter and in
developing a common law of sentencing within the state.

(7) The department may
petition for a review of a sentence committing an offender to the custody or
jurisdiction of the department. The review shall be limited to errors of law.
Such petition shall be filed with the court of appeals no later than ninety
days after the department has actual knowledge of terms of the sentence. The
petition shall include a certification by the department that all reasonable
efforts to resolve the dispute at the superior court level have been exhausted.

Sec. 20. RCW 9.94A.660 and 2001 c
10 s 4 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) An offender is
eligible for the special drug offender sentencing alternative if:

(a) The offender is
convicted of a felony that is not a violent offense or sex offense and the
violation does not involve a sentence enhancement under ((RCW 9.94A.510))
section 11 (3) or (4) of this act;

(b) The offender has no
current or prior convictions for a sex offense or violent offense in this
state, another state, or the United States;

(c) For a violation of
the Uniform Controlled Substances Act under chapter 69.50 RCW or a criminal
solicitation to commit such a violation under chapter 9A.28 RCW, the offense
involved only a small quantity of the particular controlled substance as
determined by the judge upon consideration of such factors as the weight,
purity, packaging, sale price, and street value of the controlled substance;
and

(d) The offender has
not been found by the United States attorney general to be subject to a
deportation detainer or order and does not become subject to a deportation
order during the period of the sentence.

(2) If the standard
sentence range is greater than one year and the sentencing court determines
that the offender is eligible for this alternative and that the offender and
the community will benefit from the use of the alternative, the judge may waive
imposition of a sentence within the standard sentence range and impose a
sentence that must include a period of total confinement in a state facility
for one-half of the midpoint of the standard sentence range. During
incarceration in the state facility, offenders sentenced under this subsection
shall undergo a comprehensive substance abuse assessment and receive, within
available resources, treatment services appropriate for the offender. The
treatment services shall be designed by the division of alcohol and substance
abuse of the department of social and health services, in cooperation with the
department of corrections.

The court shall also
impose:

(a) The remainder of
the midpoint of the standard range as a term of community custody which must
include appropriate substance abuse treatment in a program that has been
approved by the division of alcohol and substance abuse of the department of
social and health services;

(b) Crime-related
prohibitions including a condition not to use illegal controlled substances;

(c) A requirement to
submit to urinalysis or other testing to monitor that status; and

(d) A term of community
custody pursuant to RCW 9.94A.715 to be imposed upon failure to complete or
administrative termination from the special drug offender sentencing
alternative program.

The court may prohibit
the offender from using alcohol or controlled substances and may require that
the monitoring for controlled substances be conducted by the department or by a
treatment alternatives to street crime program or a comparable court or
agency-referred program. The offender may be required to pay thirty dollars
per month while on community custody to offset the cost of monitoring. In
addition, the court shall impose three or more of the following conditions:

(i) Devote time to a
specific employment or training;

(ii) Remain within
prescribed geographical boundaries and notify the court or the community
corrections officer before any change in the offender's address or employment;

(iii) Report as
directed to a community corrections officer;

(iv) Pay all
court-ordered legal financial obligations;

(v) Perform community
service work;

(vi) Stay out of areas
designated by the sentencing court;

(vii) Such other
conditions as the court may require such as affirmative conditions.

(3) If the offender
violates any of the sentence conditions in subsection (2) of this section or is
found by the United States attorney general to be subject to a deportation
order, a violation hearing shall be held by the department unless waived by the
offender.

(a) If the department
finds that conditions have been willfully violated, the offender may be
reclassified to serve the remaining balance of the original sentence.

(b) If the department
finds that the offender is subject to a valid deportation order, the department
may administratively terminate the offender from the program and reclassify the
offender to serve the remaining balance of the original sentence.

(4) The department
shall determine the rules for calculating the value of a day fine based on the
offender's income and reasonable obligations which the offender has for the
support of the offender and any dependents. These rules shall be developed in
consultation with the administrator for the courts, the office of financial
management, and the commission.

(5) An offender who
fails to complete the special drug offender sentencing alternative program or
who is administratively terminated from the program shall be reclassified to
serve the unexpired term of his or her sentence as ordered by the sentencing court
and shall be subject to all rules relating to earned release time. An offender
who violates any conditions of supervision as defined by the department shall
be sanctioned. Sanctions may include, but are not limited to, reclassifying
the offender to serve the unexpired term of his or her sentence as ordered by
the sentencing court. If an offender is reclassified to serve the unexpired
term of his or her sentence, the offender shall be subject to all rules
relating to earned release time.

Sec. 21. RCW 9.94A.728 and 2000 c
28 s 28 are each amended to read as follows:

No person serving a
sentence imposed pursuant to this chapter and committed to the custody of the
department shall leave the confines of the correctional facility or be released
prior to the expiration of the sentence except as follows:

(1) Except as otherwise
provided for in subsection (2) of this section, the term of the sentence of an
offender committed to a correctional facility operated by the department may be
reduced by earned release time in accordance with procedures that shall be
developed and promulgated by the correctional agency having jurisdiction in
which the offender is confined. The earned release time shall be for good
behavior and good performance, as determined by the correctional agency having
jurisdiction. The correctional agency shall not credit the offender with
earned release credits in advance of the offender actually earning the
credits. Any program established pursuant to this section shall allow an
offender to earn early release credits for presentence incarceration. If an
offender is transferred from a county jail to the department, the administrator
of a county jail facility shall certify to the department the amount of time
spent in custody at the facility and the amount of earned release time. An
offender who has been convicted of a felony committed after July 23, 1995, that
involves any applicable deadly weapon enhancements under ((RCW 9.94A.510))
section 11 (3) or (4) of this act, or both, shall not receive any
good time credits or earned release time for that portion of his or her
sentence that results from any deadly weapon enhancements. In the case of an
offender convicted of a serious violent offense, or a sex offense that is a
class A felony, committed on or after July 1, 1990, the aggregate earned
release time may not exceed fifteen percent of the sentence. In no other case
shall the aggregate earned release time exceed one-third of the total sentence;

(2)(a) A person convicted
of a sex offense or an offense categorized as a serious violent offense,
assault in the second degree, vehicular homicide, vehicular assault, assault of
a child in the second degree, any crime against persons where it is determined
in accordance with RCW 9.94A.602 that the offender or an accomplice was armed
with a deadly weapon at the time of commission, or any felony offense under
chapter 69.50 or 69.52 RCW, committed before July 1, 2000, may become eligible,
in accordance with a program developed by the department, for transfer to
community custody status in lieu of earned release time pursuant to subsection
(1) of this section;

(b) A person convicted
of a sex offense, a violent offense, any crime against persons under RCW
9.94A.411(2), or a felony offense under chapter 69.50 or 69.52 RCW, committed
on or after July 1, 2000, may become eligible, in accordance with a program
developed by the department, for transfer to community custody status in lieu
of earned release time pursuant to subsection (1) of this section;

(3) An offender may
leave a correctional facility pursuant to an authorized furlough or leave of
absence. In addition, offenders may leave a correctional facility when in the
custody of a corrections officer or officers;

(4)(a) The secretary
may authorize an extraordinary medical placement for an offender when all of
the following conditions exist:

(i) The offender has a
medical condition that is serious enough to require costly care or treatment;

(ii) The offender poses
a low risk to the community because he or she is physically incapacitated due
to age or the medical condition; and

(iii) Granting the
extraordinary medical placement will result in a cost savings to the state.

(b) An offender
sentenced to death or to life imprisonment without the possibility of release
or parole is not eligible for an extraordinary medical placement.

(c) The secretary shall
require electronic monitoring for all offenders in extraordinary medical
placement unless the electronic monitoring equipment interferes with the
function of the offender's medical equipment or results in the loss of funding
for the offender's medical care. The secretary shall specify who shall provide
the monitoring services and the terms under which the monitoring shall be performed.

(d) The secretary may
revoke an extraordinary medical placement under this subsection at any time.

(5) The governor, upon
recommendation from the clemency and pardons board, may grant an extraordinary
release for reasons of serious health problems, senility, advanced age,
extraordinary meritorious acts, or other extraordinary circumstances;

(6) No more than the
final six months of the sentence may be served in partial confinement designed
to aid the offender in finding work and reestablishing himself or herself in
the community;

(7) The governor may
pardon any offender;

(8) The department may
release an offender from confinement any time within ten days before a release
date calculated under this section; and

(9) An offender may
leave a correctional facility prior to completion of his or her sentence if the
sentence has been reduced as provided in RCW 9.94A.870.

Notwithstanding any
other provisions of this section, an offender sentenced for a felony crime
listed in RCW 9.94A.540 as subject to a mandatory minimum sentence of total
confinement shall not be released from total confinement before the completion
of the listed mandatory minimum sentence for that felony crime of conviction
unless allowed under RCW 9.94A.540, however persistent offenders are not
eligible for extraordinary medical placement.

Sec. 22. RCW 9.94A.850 and 2000 c
28 s 41 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) A sentencing
guidelines commission is established as an agency of state government.

(2) The legislature
finds that the commission, having accomplished its original statutory directive
to implement this chapter, and having expertise in sentencing practice and
policies, shall:

(a) Evaluate state
sentencing policy, to include whether the sentencing ranges and standards are
consistent with and further:

(i) The purposes of
this chapter as defined in RCW 9.94A.010; and

(ii) The intent of the
legislature to emphasize confinement for the violent offender and alternatives
to confinement for the nonviolent offender.

The commission shall
provide the governor and the legislature with its evaluation and
recommendations under this subsection not later than December 1, 1996, and
every two years thereafter;

(b) Recommend to the
legislature revisions or modifications to the standard sentence ranges, state
sentencing policy, prosecuting standards, and other standards. If
implementation of the revisions or modifications would result in exceeding the
capacity of correctional facilities, then the commission shall accompany its
recommendation with an additional list of standard sentence ranges which are consistent
with correction capacity;

(c) Study the existing
criminal code and from time to time make recommendations to the legislature for
modification;

(d)(i) Serve as a
clearinghouse and information center for the collection, preparation, analysis,
and dissemination of information on state and local adult and juvenile
sentencing practices; (ii) develop and maintain a computerized adult and
juvenile sentencing information system by individual superior court judge
consisting of offender, offense, history, and sentence information entered from
judgment and sentence forms for all adult felons; and (iii) conduct ongoing
research regarding adult and juvenile sentencing guidelines, use of total
confinement and alternatives to total confinement, plea bargaining, and other
matters relating to the improvement of the adult criminal justice system and
the juvenile justice system;

(e) Assume the powers
and duties of the juvenile disposition standards commission after June 30,
1996;

(f) Evaluate the
effectiveness of existing disposition standards and related statutes in
implementing policies set forth in RCW 13.40.010 generally, specifically review
the guidelines relating to the confinement of minor and first-time offenders as
well as the use of diversion, and review the application of current and
proposed juvenile sentencing standards and guidelines for potential adverse
impacts on the sentencing outcomes of racial and ethnic minority youth;

(g) Solicit the
comments and suggestions of the juvenile justice community concerning
disposition standards, and make recommendations to the legislature regarding
revisions or modifications of the standards. The evaluations shall be
submitted to the legislature on December 1 of each odd-numbered year. The
department of social and health services shall provide the commission with
available data concerning the implementation of the disposition standards and
related statutes and their effect on the performance of the department's
responsibilities relating to juvenile offenders, and with recommendations for
modification of the disposition standards. The office of the administrator for
the courts shall provide the commission with available data on diversion and
dispositions of juvenile offenders under chapter 13.40 RCW; and

(h) Not later than
December 1, 1997, and at least every two years thereafter, based on available
information, report to the governor and the legislature on:

(i) Racial
disproportionality in juvenile and adult sentencing;

(ii) The capacity of
state and local juvenile and adult facilities and resources; and

(iii) Recidivism
information on adult and juvenile offenders.

(3) Each of the
commission's recommended standard sentence ranges shall include one or more of
the following: Total confinement, partial confinement, community supervision,
community service, and a fine.

(4) The standard
sentence ranges of total and partial confinement under this chapter, except
as provided in section 8 of this act, are subject to the following
limitations:

(a) If the maximum term
in the range is one year or less, the minimum term in the range shall be no
less than one-third of the maximum term in the range, except that if the
maximum term in the range is ninety days or less, the minimum term may be less
than one-third of the maximum;

(b) If the maximum term
in the range is greater than one year, the minimum term in the range shall be
no less than seventy-five percent of the maximum term in the range, except that
for murder in the second degree in seriousness level XIV under RCW 9.94A.510,
the minimum term in the range shall be no less than fifty percent of the
maximum term in the range; and

(c) The maximum term of
confinement in a range may not exceed the statutory maximum for the crime as
provided in RCW 9A.20.021.

(5)(a) Not later than
December 31, 1999, the commission shall propose to the legislature the initial
community custody ranges to be included in sentences under RCW 9.94A.715 for
crimes committed on or after July 1, 2000. Not later than December 31 of each
year, the commission may propose modifications to the ranges. The ranges shall
be based on the principles in RCW 9.94A.010, and shall take into account the
funds available to the department for community custody. The minimum term in
each range shall not be less than one-half of the maximum term.

(b) The legislature
may, by enactment of a legislative bill, adopt or modify the community custody
ranges proposed by the commission. If the legislature fails to adopt or modify
the initial ranges in its next regular session after they are proposed, the
proposed ranges shall take effect without legislative approval for crimes
committed on or after July 1, 2000.

(c) When the commission
proposes modifications to ranges pursuant to this subsection, the legislature
may, by enactment of a bill, adopt or modify the ranges proposed by the
commission for crimes committed on or after July 1 of the year after they were
proposed. Unless the legislature adopts or modifies the commission's proposal
in its next regular session, the proposed ranges shall not take effect.

(6) The commission
shall exercise its duties under this section in conformity with chapter 34.05
RCW.

Sec. 23. RCW 10.01.210 and 1995 c
129 s 18 are each amended to read as follows:

Any and all law
enforcement agencies and personnel, criminal justice attorneys, sentencing
judges, and state and local correctional facilities and personnel may, but are
not required to, give any and all offenders either written or oral notice, or
both, of the sanctions imposed and criminal justice changes regarding armed
offenders, including but not limited to the subjects of:

(1) Felony crimes
involving any deadly weapon special verdict under RCW 9.94A.602;

(2) Any and all deadly
weapon enhancements under ((RCW 9.94A.510)) section 11 (3) or (4)
of this act, or both, as well as any federal firearm, ammunition, or
other deadly weapon enhancements;

(3) Any and all felony
crimes requiring the possession, display, or use of any deadly weapon as well
as the many increased penalties for these crimes including the creation of
theft of a firearm and possessing a stolen firearm;

(4) New prosecuting
standards established for filing charges for all crimes involving any deadly
weapons;

(5) Removal of good
time for any and all deadly weapon enhancements; and

(6) Providing the death
penalty for those who commit first degree murder: (a) To join, maintain, or
advance membership in an identifiable group; (b) as part of a drive-by
shooting; or (c) to avoid prosecution as a persistent offender as defined in
RCW 9.94A.030.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
24. A new section is added
to chapter 9.94A RCW to read as follows:

The Washington state
institute for public policy shall by March 1, 2003, report on the
cost-effectiveness of existing drug courts in Washington and their impacts on
reducing recidivism.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
25. Nothing in this act
creates an entitlement for a criminal defendant to any specific sanction,
alternative, sentence option, or substance abuse treatment.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
26. If specific funding for
the purposes of this act, referencing this act by bill or chapter number, is
not provided by June 30, 2002, in the omnibus appropriations act, this act is
null and void.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
27. If any provision of this
act or its application to any person or circumstance is held invalid, the
remainder of the act or the application of the provision to other persons or
circumstances is not affected.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
28. Sections 2 and 3 of this
act take effect July 1, 2002, and apply to crimes committed on or after July 1,
2002.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
29. Section 2 of this act
expires July 1, 2004.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
30. Sections 7 through 11 and
14 through 23 of this act take effect July 1, 2004, and apply to crimes
committed on or after July 1, 2004.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 31. Sections 1, 4 through 6,
12, 13, 25, and 26 of this act are necessary for the immediate preservation of
the public peace, health, or safety, or support of the state government and its
existing public institutions, and take effect immediately.

---
END ---