BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF
WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec.
1. A new section is added
to chapter 77.36 RCW to read as follows:

The
department must maintain a list of persons holding valid wildlife hunting
licenses, arranged by county of residence, who have indicated that they are
available to hunt deer or elk that are causing damage to crops. Individuals
must meet all the qualifications established by the department in order to be
placed upon the list. The department must update the list at least once every
three years. The department must utilize this list when contacting persons to
assist in controlling game damage to crops. The department must make all
reasonable efforts to use an individual who resides within the county where the
hunting of deer or elk will occur before contacting a person who is not a
resident of that county. The department must rotate the names of people who it
contacts on the list in order to provide a fair distribution of the hunting
opportunity. Hunters who participate in hunts under this section must report
any kills to the department. The department shall include a summary of the
wildlife harvested in these hunts in the annual game management reports it
makes available to the public.

--- END ---