BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF
WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1. RCW 36.70B.060 and 1995
c 347 s 407 are each amended to read as follows:

Not later than March
31, 1996, each local government planning under RCW 36.70A.040 shall establish
by ordinance or resolution an integrated and consolidated project permit
process that may be included in its development regulations. In addition to
the elements required by RCW 36.70B.050, the process shall include the
following elements:

(1) A determination of
completeness to the applicant as required by RCW 36.70B.070;

(2) A notice of
application to the public and agencies with jurisdiction as required by RCW
36.70B.110;

(3) Except as provided
in RCW 36.70B.140, an optional consolidated project permit review process as
provided in RCW 36.70B.120. The review process shall provide for no more than
one consolidated open record hearing and one closed record appeal. However,
a second open record hearing and closed record appeal shall be allowed if,
after an initial open record hearing and closed record appeal, an environmental
impact statement, declaration of nonsignificance, threshold determination, or
other action is taken under chapter 43.21C RCW in response to a finding that
the initial action was inadequate. If an open record predecision hearing
is provided prior to the decision on a project permit, the process shall not
allow a subsequent open record appeal hearing;

(4) Provision allowing
for any public meeting or required open record hearing to be combined with any
public meeting or open record hearing that may be held on the project by
another local, state, regional, federal, or other agency, in accordance with
provisions of RCW ((36.70B.090 and)) 36.70B.110;

(5) A single report
stating all the decisions made as of the date of the report on all project
permits included in the consolidated permit process that do not require an open
record predecision hearing and any recommendations on project permits that do
not require an open record predecision hearing. The report shall state any
mitigation required or proposed under the development regulations or the
agency's authority under RCW 43.21C.060. The report may be the local permit.
If a threshold determination other than a determination of significance has not
been issued previously by the local government, the report shall include or
append this determination;

(6) Except for the
appeal of a determination of significance as provided in RCW 43.21C.075, if a
local government elects to provide an appeal of its threshold determinations or
project permit decisions, the local government shall provide for no more than
one consolidated open record hearing on such appeal. The local government need
not provide for any further appeal and may provide an appeal for some but not
all project permit decisions. If an appeal is provided after the open record
hearing, it shall be a closed record appeal before a single decision-making
body or officer;

(7) A notice of
decision as required by RCW 36.70B.130 and issued within the time period
provided in RCW 36.70B.080 ((and 36.70B.090));

(8) Completion of
project review by the local government, including environmental review and
public review and any appeals to the local government((, within any
applicable time periods under RCW 36.70B.090)); and

(9) Any
other provisions not inconsistent with the requirements of this chapter or
chapter 43.21C RCW.

--- END ---