BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF
WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec.
1. As the disparity in the
cost-of-living between school districts across the state has grown in recent
years, the purchasing power of equalized salaries has become more disparate for
K-12 employees. A major contributor to these costs is housing. The purpose of
this act is to authorize a housing allowance for nonsupervisory public school
employees in order to minimize disparities in purchasing power among
educational employees across the state.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
2. A new section is added
to chapter 28A.400 RCW to read as follows:

(1) Eligible school
districts may provide a housing allowance for nonsupervisory classified and
certificated employees with revenues raised from a housing allowance levy
authorized under this section.

(2) The cost of the
housing for each school district and the statewide median shall be determined
every four years based on a standard set of housing specifications and on data
reported for the most recent annual period for which data are available. The
collection of data shall be done by a nationally recognized entity that
collects statistically valid housing cost data for federal government agencies
and businesses, selected by the superintendent of public instruction and
subject to approval by the legislative fiscal committees and the office of
financial management. The office of financial management shall contract with
the entity selected under this subsection (2) from funds provided for this
purpose. For the purposes of this section, the "statewide median cost of
housing" is the cost at which there is an equal number of districts with
higher housing costs and with lower housing costs.

(3) The housing
allowance levy shall be authorized for school districts having housing costs
that exceed the statewide median cost of housing as determined under subsection
(2) of this section. The calculation of the maximum levy allowed for a
qualifying school district shall be the number of nonsupervisory classified and
certificated full‑time equivalent employees multiplied by the difference
between the district's cost of housing and the median cost of housing
statewide. For purposes of this calculation, the difference between the
district's cost of housing and the statewide median shall not exceed fifty
percent of the median.

(4) Individual payment
of the housing allowance to nonsupervisory classified and certificated
employees is subject to collective bargaining but shall be paid only to
actively employed nonsupervisory classified and certificated employees using a
formula that recognizes and is responsive to the disproportionate housing
assistance needs of new teachers and of certificated and classified employees
at the bottom end of a salary schedule or pay scale. The housing allowance
shall not be considered as within the definition of basic education for the
purposes of chapter 28A.150 RCW, nor is it earnable compensation as defined in
RCW 41.32.010 or compensation earnable as defined in RCW 41.40.010 and
41.35.010.

(5) Local school
districts that qualify for a housing allowance levy under subsection (3) of
this section may submit to voters an excess general fund levy on real property
to support up to and including the maximum housing levy authority determined in
subsection (3) of this section. This levy is not subject to the limitations in
RCW 84.52.0531. This levy does not qualify a school district for local effort
assistance under chapter 28A.500 RCW.

(6) The office of the
superintendent of public instruction shall administer the housing allowance
program and shall adopt rules for implementation.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
3. A new section is added
to chapter 28A.500 RCW to read as follows:

Levies authorized under
section 2 of this act shall not be considered in determining a school
district's eligibility for local effort assistance under this chapter.

Sec. 4. RCW 28A.400.200 and 1997
c 141 s 2 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) Every school
district board of directors shall fix, alter, allow, and order paid salaries
and compensation for all district employees in conformance with this section.

(2)(a) Salaries for
certificated instructional staff shall not be less than the salary provided in
the appropriations act in the statewide salary allocation schedule for an
employee with a baccalaureate degree and zero years of service; and

(b) Salaries for certificated
instructional staff with a masters degree shall not be less than the salary
provided in the appropriations act in the statewide salary allocation schedule
for an employee with a masters degree and zero years of service;

(3)(a) The actual
average salary paid to basic education and special education certificated
instructional staff shall not exceed the district's average basic education and
special education program certificated instructional staff salary used for the
state basic education allocations for that school year as determined pursuant
to RCW 28A.150.410.

(b) Fringe benefit
contributions for basic education and special education certificated
instructional staff shall be included as salary under (a) of this subsection
only to the extent that the district's actual average benefit contribution
exceeds the amount of the insurance benefits allocation provided per
certificated instructional staff unit in the state operating appropriations act
in effect at the time the compensation is payable. For purposes of this
section, fringe benefits shall not include payment for unused leave for illness
or injury under RCW 28A.400.210; employer contributions for old age survivors
insurance, workers' compensation, unemployment compensation, and retirement benefits
under the Washington state retirement system; or employer contributions for
health benefits in excess of the insurance benefits allocation provided per
certificated instructional staff unit in the state operating appropriations act
in effect at the time the compensation is payable. A school district may not
use state funds to provide employer contributions for such excess health
benefits.

(c) Salary and benefits
for certificated instructional staff in programs other than basic education and
special education shall be consistent with the salary and benefits paid to
certificated instructional staff in the basic education and special education
programs.

(4) Salaries and
benefits for certificated instructional staff may exceed the limitations in
subsection (3) of this section only by separate contract for additional time,
additional responsibilities, or incentives. Supplemental contracts shall not
cause the state to incur any present or future funding obligation.
Supplemental contracts shall be subject to the collective bargaining provisions
of chapter 41.59 RCW and the provisions of RCW 28A.405.240, shall not exceed
one year, and if not renewed shall not constitute adverse change in accordance
with RCW 28A.405.300 through 28A.405.380. No district may enter into a
supplemental contract under this subsection for the provision of services which
are a part of the basic education program required by Article IX, section 3 of
the state Constitution.

(5) Employee benefit
plans offered by any district shall comply with RCW 28A.400.350 and 28A.400.275
and 28A.400.280.

(6) Housing
allowances authorized in section 2 of this act shall not be included as salary
under this section and shall not be included in salary limitations.

Sec. 5. RCW 84.52.0531 and 1997
c 259 s 2 are each amended to read as follows:

The maximum dollar
amount which may be levied by or for any school district for maintenance and
operation support under the provisions of RCW 84.52.053 shall be determined as
follows:

(1) For excess levies
for collection in calendar year 1997, the maximum dollar amount shall be
calculated pursuant to the laws and rules in effect in November 1996.

(2) For excess levies
for collection in calendar year 1998 and thereafter, the maximum dollar amount
shall be the sum of (a) plus or minus (b) and (c) of this subsection minus (d)
of this subsection:

(a) The district's levy
base as defined in subsection (3) of this section multiplied by the district's
maximum levy percentage as defined in subsection (4) of this section;

(b) For districts in a
high/nonhigh relationship, the high school district's maximum levy amount shall
be reduced and the nonhigh school district's maximum levy amount shall be
increased by an amount equal to the estimated amount of the nonhigh payment due
to the high school district under RCW 28A.545.030(3) and 28A.545.050 for the
school year commencing the year of the levy;

(c) For districts in an
interdistrict cooperative agreement, the nonresident school district's maximum
levy amount shall be reduced and the resident school district's maximum levy
amount shall be increased by an amount equal to the per pupil basic education
allocation included in the nonresident district's levy base under subsection
(3) of this section multiplied by:

(i) The number of
full-time equivalent students served from the resident district in the prior
school year; multiplied by:

(ii) The serving
district's maximum levy percentage determined under subsection (4) of this
section; increased by:

(iii) The percent
increase per full-time equivalent student as stated in the state basic
education appropriation section of the biennial budget between the prior school
year and the current school year divided by fifty-five percent;

(d) The district's maximum
levy amount shall be reduced by the maximum amount of state matching funds for
which the district is eligible under RCW 28A.500.010.

(3) For excess levies
for collection in calendar year 1998 and thereafter, a district's levy base
shall be the sum of allocations in (a) through (c) of this subsection received
by the district for the prior school year, including allocations for
compensation increases, plus the sum of such allocations multiplied by the
percent increase per full time equivalent student as stated in the state basic
education appropriation section of the biennial budget between the prior school
year and the current school year and divided by fifty-five percent. A
district's levy base shall not include local school district property tax levies
or other local revenues, or state and federal allocations not identified in (a)
through (c) of this subsection.

(a) The district's
basic education allocation as determined pursuant to RCW 28A.150.250,
28A.150.260, and 28A.150.350;

(b) State and federal
categorical allocations for the following programs:

(i) Pupil
transportation;

(ii) Special education;

(iii) Education of
highly capable students;

(iv) Compensatory
education, including but not limited to learning assistance, migrant education,
Indian education, refugee programs, and bilingual education;

(v) Food services; and

(vi) Statewide block
grant programs; and

(c) Any other federal
allocations for elementary and secondary school programs, including direct
grants, other than federal impact aid funds and allocations in lieu of taxes.

(4) A district's
maximum levy percentage shall be twenty-two percent in 1998 and twenty-four
percent in 1999 and every year thereafter; plus, for qualifying districts, the
grandfathered percentage determined as follows:

(a) For 1997, the
difference between the district's 1993 maximum levy percentage and twenty
percent; and

(b) For 1998 and
thereafter, the percentage calculated as follows:

(i) Multiply the
grandfathered percentage for the prior year times the district's levy base
determined under subsection (3) of this section;

(ii) Reduce the result
of (b)(i) of this subsection by any levy reduction funds as defined in
subsection (5) of this section that are to be allocated to the district for the
current school year;

(iii) Divide the result
of (b)(ii) of this subsection by the district's levy base; and

(iv) Take the greater
of zero or the percentage calculated in (b)(iii) of this subsection.

(5) "Levy
reduction funds" shall mean increases in state funds from the prior school
year for programs included under subsection (3) of this section: (a) That are
not attributable to enrollment changes, compensation increases, or inflationary
adjustments; and (b) that are or were specifically identified as levy reduction
funds in the appropriations act. If levy reduction funds are dependent on
formula factors which would not be finalized until after the start of the
current school year, the superintendent of public instruction shall estimate
the total amount of levy reduction funds by using prior school year data in
place of current school year data. Levy reduction funds shall not include
moneys received by school districts from cities or counties.

(6) For the purposes of
this section, "prior school year" means the most recent school year
completed prior to the year in which the levies are to be collected.

(7) For the purposes of
this section, "current school year" means the year immediately following
the prior school year.

(8) Funds collected
from transportation vehicle fund tax levies shall not be subject to the levy
limitations in this section.

(9) The limitations
in this section do not apply to excess general fund levies for the support of
the housing allowance provided for in section 2 of this act.

(10) The
superintendent of public instruction shall develop rules ((and regulations))
and inform school districts of the pertinent data necessary to carry out the
provisions of this section.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
6. A new section is added
to chapter 84.52 RCW to read as follows:

A levy submitted to
voters under section 2 of this act may be submitted as a separate levy, or as
part of a maintenance and operation levy if the housing allowance levy is
separately identified.

Sec. 7. RCW 41.32.010 and 1997 c
254 s 3 are each amended to read as follows:

As used in this
chapter, unless a different meaning is plainly required by the context:

(1)(a) "Accumulated
contributions" for plan 1 members, means the sum of all regular annuity
contributions and, except for the purpose of withdrawal at the time of
retirement, any amount paid under RCW 41.50.165(2) with regular interest
thereon.

(b) "Accumulated contributions"
for plan 2 members, means the sum of all contributions standing to the credit
of a member in the member's individual account, including any amount paid under
RCW 41.50.165(2), together with the regular interest thereon.

(2) "Actuarial
equivalent" means a benefit of equal value when computed upon the basis of
such mortality tables and regulations as shall be adopted by the director and
regular interest.

(3) "Annuity"
means the moneys payable per year during life by reason of accumulated contributions
of a member.

(4) "Member
reserve" means the fund in which all of the accumulated contributions of
members are held.

(5)(a)
"Beneficiary" for plan 1 members, means any person in receipt of a
retirement allowance or other benefit provided by this chapter.

(b)
"Beneficiary" for plan 2 and plan 3 members, means any person in
receipt of a retirement allowance or other benefit provided by this chapter
resulting from service rendered to an employer by another person.

(6)
"Contract" means any agreement for service and compensation between a
member and an employer.

(7) "Creditable
service" means membership service plus prior service for which credit is
allowable. This subsection shall apply only to plan 1 members.

(8)
"Dependent" means receiving one‑half or more of support from a
member.

(9) "Disability
allowance" means monthly payments during disability. This subsection
shall apply only to plan 1 members.

(10)(a) "Earnable
compensation" for plan 1 members, means:

(i) All salaries and
wages paid by an employer to an employee member of the retirement system for
personal services rendered during a fiscal year. In all cases where
compensation includes maintenance the employer shall fix the value of that part
of the compensation not paid in money.

(ii) "Earnable
compensation" for plan 1 members also includes the following actual or
imputed payments, which are not paid for personal services:

(A) Retroactive
payments to an individual by an employer on reinstatement of the employee in a
position, or payments by an employer to an individual in lieu of reinstatement
in a position which are awarded or granted as the equivalent of the salary or
wages which the individual would have earned during a payroll period shall be
considered earnable compensation and the individual shall receive the
equivalent service credit.

(B) If a leave of
absence, without pay, is taken by a member for the purpose of serving as a
member of the state legislature, and such member has served in the legislature
five or more years, the salary which would have been received for the position
from which the leave of absence was taken shall be considered as compensation
earnable if the employee's contribution thereon is paid by the employee. In
addition, where a member has been a member of the state legislature for five or
more years, earnable compensation for the member's two highest compensated
consecutive years of service shall include a sum not to exceed thirty‑six
hundred dollars for each of such two consecutive years, regardless of whether
or not legislative service was rendered during those two years.

(iii) For members
employed less than full time under written contract with a school district, or
community college district, in an instructional position, for which the member
receives service credit of less than one year in all of the years used to
determine the earnable compensation used for computing benefits due under RCW
41.32.497, 41.32.498, and 41.32.520, the member may elect to have earnable
compensation defined as provided in RCW 41.32.345. For the purposes of this
subsection, the term "instructional position" means a position in
which more than seventy‑five percent of the member's time is spent as a
classroom instructor (including office hours), a librarian, or a counselor. Earnable
compensation shall be so defined only for the purpose of the calculation of
retirement benefits and only as necessary to insure that members who receive
fractional service credit under RCW 41.32.270 receive benefits proportional to
those received by members who have received full‑time service credit.

(iv) "Earnable
compensation" does not include:

(A) Remuneration for
unused sick leave authorized under RCW 41.04.340, 28A.400.210, or 28A.310.490;

(B) Remuneration for
unused annual leave in excess of thirty days as authorized by RCW 43.01.044 and
43.01.041;

(C) Housing
allowances authorized in section 2 of this act.

(b) "Earnable
compensation" for plan 2 and plan 3 members, means salaries or wages
earned by a member during a payroll period for personal services, including
overtime payments, and shall include wages and salaries deferred under
provisions established pursuant to sections 403(b), 414(h), and 457 of the
United States Internal Revenue Code, but shall exclude lump sum payments for
deferred annual sick leave, unused accumulated vacation, unused accumulated
annual leave, ((or)) any form of severance pay, and housing
allowances authorized in section 2 of this act.

"Earnable
compensation" for plan 2 and plan 3 members also includes the following
actual or imputed payments which, except in the case of (b)(ii)(B) of this
subsection, are not paid for personal services:

(i) Retroactive
payments to an individual by an employer on reinstatement of the employee in a
position or payments by an employer to an individual in lieu of reinstatement
in a position which are awarded or granted as the equivalent of the salary or
wages which the individual would have earned during a payroll period shall be
considered earnable compensation, to the extent provided above, and the
individual shall receive the equivalent service credit.

(ii) In any year in
which a member serves in the legislature the member shall have the option of
having such member's earnable compensation be the greater of:

(A) The earnable
compensation the member would have received had such member not served in the
legislature; or

(B) Such member's
actual earnable compensation received for teaching and legislative service
combined. Any additional contributions to the retirement system required because
compensation earnable under (b)(ii)(A) of this subsection is greater than
compensation earnable under (b)(ii)(B) of this subsection shall be paid by the
member for both member and employer contributions.

(11)
"Employer" means the state of Washington, the school district, or any
agency of the state of Washington by which the member is paid.

(12) "Fiscal
year" means a year which begins July 1st and ends June 30th of the
following year.

(13) "Former state
fund" means the state retirement fund in operation for teachers under
chapter 187, Laws of 1923, as amended.

(14) "Local
fund" means any of the local retirement funds for teachers operated in any
school district in accordance with the provisions of chapter 163, Laws of 1917
as amended.

(15) "Member"
means any teacher included in the membership of the retirement system. Also,
any other employee of the public schools who, on July 1, 1947, had not elected
to be exempt from membership and who, prior to that date, had by an authorized
payroll deduction, contributed to the member reserve.

(16) "Membership
service" means service rendered subsequent to the first day of eligibility
of a person to membership in the retirement system: PROVIDED, That where a
member is employed by two or more employers the individual shall receive no
more than one service credit month during any calendar month in which multiple
service is rendered. The provisions of this subsection shall apply only to
plan 1 members.

(17)
"Pension" means the moneys payable per year during life from the
pension reserve.

(18) "Pension
reserve" is a fund in which shall be accumulated an actuarial reserve
adequate to meet present and future pension liabilities of the system and from
which all pension obligations are to be paid.

(19) "Prior
service" means service rendered prior to the first date of eligibility to
membership in the retirement system for which credit is allowable. The
provisions of this subsection shall apply only to plan 1 members.

(20) "Prior
service contributions" means contributions made by a member to secure
credit for prior service. The provisions of this subsection shall apply only
to plan 1 members.

(21) "Public
school" means any institution or activity operated by the state of
Washington or any instrumentality or political subdivision thereof employing
teachers, except the University of Washington and Washington State University.

(22) "Regular
contributions" means the amounts required to be deducted from the compensation
of a member and credited to the member's individual account in the member
reserve. This subsection shall apply only to plan 1 members.

(23) "Regular
interest" means such rate as the director may determine.

(24)(a)
"Retirement allowance" for plan 1 members, means monthly payments
based on the sum of annuity and pension, or any optional benefits payable in
lieu thereof.

(b) "Retirement
allowance" for plan 2 and plan 3 members, means monthly payments to a
retiree or beneficiary as provided in this chapter.

(25) "Retirement
system" means the Washington state teachers' retirement system.

(26)(a)
"Service" for plan 1 members means the time during which a member has
been employed by an employer for compensation.

(i) If a member is
employed by two or more employers the individual shall receive no more than one
service credit month during any calendar month in which multiple service is
rendered.

(ii) As authorized by
RCW 28A.400.300, up to forty-five days of sick leave may be creditable as
service solely for the purpose of determining eligibility to retire under RCW
41.32.470.

(iii) As authorized in
RCW 41.32.065, service earned in an out-of-state retirement system that covers
teachers in public schools may be applied solely for the purpose of determining
eligibility to retire under RCW 41.32.470.

(b) "Service"
for plan 2 and plan 3 members, means periods of employment by a member for one
or more employers for which earnable compensation is earned subject to the
following conditions:

(i) A member employed
in an eligible position or as a substitute shall receive one service credit
month for each month of September through August of the following year if he or
she earns earnable compensation for eight hundred ten or more hours during that
period and is employed during nine of those months, except that a member may
not receive credit for any period prior to the member's employment in an
eligible position except as provided in RCW 41.32.812 and 41.50.132;

(ii) If a member is
employed either in an eligible position or as a substitute teacher for nine
months of the twelve month period between September through August of the
following year but earns earnable compensation for less than eight hundred ten
hours but for at least six hundred thirty hours, he or she will receive one‑half
of a service credit month for each month of the twelve month period;

(iii) All other members
in an eligible position or as a substitute teacher shall receive service credit
as follows:

(A) A service credit
month is earned in those calendar months where earnable compensation is earned
for ninety or more hours;

(B) A half-service
credit month is earned in those calendar months where earnable compensation is
earned for at least seventy hours but less than ninety hours; and

(C) A quarter-service
credit month is earned in those calendar months where earnable compensation is
earned for less than seventy hours.

(iv) Any person who is
a member of the teachers' retirement system and who is elected or appointed to
a state elective position may continue to be a member of the retirement system
and continue to receive a service credit month for each of the months in a
state elective position by making the required member contributions.

(v) When an individual
is employed by two or more employers the individual shall only receive one
month's service credit during any calendar month in which multiple service for
ninety or more hours is rendered.

(vi) As authorized by
RCW 28A.400.300, up to forty-five days of sick leave may be creditable as service
solely for the purpose of determining eligibility to retire under RCW
41.32.470. For purposes of plan 2 and plan 3 "forty-five days" as
used in RCW 28A.400.300 is equal to two service credit months. Use of less
than forty-five days of sick leave is creditable as allowed under this
subsection as follows:

(A) Less than eleven
days equals one-quarter service credit month;

(B) Eleven or more days
but less than twenty-two days equals one-half service credit month;

(C) Twenty-two days
equals one service credit month;

(D) More than
twenty-two days but less than thirty-three days equals one and one-quarter
service credit month;

(E) Thirty-three or
more days but less than forty-five days equals one and one-half service credit
month.

(vii) As authorized in
RCW 41.32.065, service earned in an out-of-state retirement system that covers
teachers in public schools may be applied solely for the purpose of determining
eligibility to retire under RCW 41.32.470.

(viii) The department
shall adopt rules implementing this subsection.

(27) "Service
credit year" means an accumulation of months of service credit which is
equal to one when divided by twelve.

(28) "Service
credit month" means a full service credit month or an accumulation of
partial service credit months that are equal to one.

(29)
"Teacher" means any person qualified to teach who is engaged by a
public school in an instructional, administrative, or supervisory capacity.
The term includes state, educational service district, and school district
superintendents and their assistants and all employees certificated by the
superintendent of public instruction; and in addition thereto any full time
school doctor who is employed by a public school and renders service of an
instructional or educational nature.

(30) "Average
final compensation" for plan 2 and plan 3 members, means the member's
average earnable compensation of the highest consecutive sixty service credit
months prior to such member's retirement, termination, or death. Periods
constituting authorized leaves of absence may not be used in the calculation of
average final compensation except under RCW 41.32.810(2).

(31)
"Retiree" means any person who has begun accruing a retirement
allowance or other benefit provided by this chapter resulting from service
rendered to an employer while a member.

(32)
"Department" means the department of retirement systems created in
chapter 41.50 RCW.

(33)
"Director" means the director of the department.

(34) "State
elective position" means any position held by any person elected or
appointed to statewide office or elected or appointed as a member of the
legislature.

(35) "State
actuary" or "actuary" means the person appointed pursuant to RCW
44.44.010(2).

(36) "Substitute
teacher" means:

(a) A teacher who is
hired by an employer to work as a temporary teacher, except for teachers who
are annual contract employees of an employer and are guaranteed a minimum
number of hours; or

(b) Teachers who either
(i) work in ineligible positions for more than one employer or (ii) work in an
ineligible position or positions together with an eligible position.

(37)(a) "Eligible
position" for plan 2 members from June 7, 1990, through September 1, 1991,
means a position which normally requires two or more uninterrupted months of
creditable service during September through August of the following year.

(b) "Eligible
position" for plan 2 and plan 3 on and after September 1, 1991, means a
position that, as defined by the employer, normally requires five or more
months of at least seventy hours of earnable compensation during September
through August of the following year.

(c) For purposes of
this chapter an employer shall not define "position" in such a manner
that an employee's monthly work for that employer is divided into more than one
position.

(d) The elected
position of the superintendent of public instruction is an eligible position.

(38) "Plan 1"
means the teachers' retirement system, plan 1 providing the benefits and
funding provisions covering persons who first became members of the system
prior to October 1, 1977.

(39) "Plan 2"
means the teachers' retirement system, plan 2 providing the benefits and
funding provisions covering persons who first became members of the system on
and after October 1, 1977, and prior to July 1, 1996.

(40) "Plan 3"
means the teachers' retirement system, plan 3 providing the benefits and
funding provisions covering persons who first become members of the system on
and after July 1, 1996, or who transfer under RCW 41.32.817.

(41) "Index"
means, for any calendar year, that year's annual average consumer price index,
Seattle, Washington area, for urban wage earners and clerical workers, all
items compiled by the bureau of labor statistics, United States department of
labor.

(42) "Index
A" means the index for the year prior to the determination of a
postretirement adjustment.

(43) "Index
B" means the index for the year prior to index A.

(44) "Index
year" means the earliest calendar year in which the index is more than
sixty percent of index A.

(45) "Adjustment
ratio" means the value of index A divided by index B.

(46) "Annual
increase" means, initially, fifty-nine cents per month per year of service
which amount shall be increased each July 1st by three percent, rounded to the
nearest cent.

(47) "Member
account" or "member's account" for purposes of plan 3 means the
sum of the contributions and earnings on behalf of the member in the defined
contribution portion of plan 3.

(48) "Separation
from service or employment" occurs when a person has terminated all
employment with an employer.

(49)
"Employed" or "employee" means a person who is providing
services for compensation to an employer, unless the person is free from the
employer's direction and control over the performance of work. The department
shall adopt rules and interpret this subsection consistent with common law.

Sec. 8. RCW 41.40.010 and 2000 c
247 s 102 are each amended to read as follows:

As used in this
chapter, unless a different meaning is plainly required by the context:

(1) "Retirement
system" means the public employees' retirement system provided for in this
chapter.

(2)
"Department" means the department of retirement systems created in
chapter 41.50 RCW.

(3) "State
treasurer" means the treasurer of the state of Washington.

(4)(a)
"Employer" for plan 1 members, means every branch, department,
agency, commission, board, and office of the state, any political subdivision
or association of political subdivisions of the state admitted into the
retirement system, and legal entities authorized by RCW 35.63.070 and 36.70.060
or chapter 39.34 RCW; and the term shall also include any labor guild,
association, or organization the membership of a local lodge or division of
which is comprised of at least forty percent employees of an employer (other
than such labor guild, association, or organization) within this chapter. The
term may also include any city of the first class that has its own retirement
system.

(b)
"Employer" for plan 2 and plan 3 members, means every branch,
department, agency, commission, board, and office of the state, and any
political subdivision and municipal corporation of the state admitted into the
retirement system, including public agencies created pursuant to RCW 35.63.070,
36.70.060, and 39.34.030; except that after August 31, 2000, school districts
and educational service districts will no longer be employers for the public
employees' retirement system plan 2.

(5) "Member"
means any employee included in the membership of the retirement system, as
provided for in RCW 41.40.023. RCW 41.26.045 does not prohibit a person
otherwise eligible for membership in the retirement system from establishing
such membership effective when he or she first entered an eligible position.

(6) "Original member"
of this retirement system means:

(a) Any person who
became a member of the system prior to April 1, 1949;

(b) Any person who
becomes a member through the admission of an employer into the retirement
system on and after April 1, 1949, and prior to April 1, 1951;

(c) Any person who
first becomes a member by securing employment with an employer prior to April
1, 1951, provided the member has rendered at least one or more years of service
to any employer prior to October 1, 1947;

(d) Any person who first
becomes a member through the admission of an employer into the retirement
system on or after April 1, 1951, provided, such person has been in the regular
employ of the employer for at least six months of the twelve-month period
preceding the said admission date;

(e) Any member who has
restored all contributions that may have been withdrawn as provided by RCW
41.40.150 and who on the effective date of the individual's retirement becomes
entitled to be credited with ten years or more of membership service except
that the provisions relating to the minimum amount of retirement allowance for
the member upon retirement at age seventy as found in RCW 41.40.190(4) shall
not apply to the member;

(f) Any member who has
been a contributor under the system for two or more years and who has restored
all contributions that may have been withdrawn as provided by RCW 41.40.150 and
who on the effective date of the individual's retirement has rendered five or
more years of service for the state or any political subdivision prior to the
time of the admission of the employer into the system; except that the
provisions relating to the minimum amount of retirement allowance for the
member upon retirement at age seventy as found in RCW 41.40.190(4) shall not
apply to the member.

(7) "New
member" means a person who becomes a member on or after April 1, 1949,
except as otherwise provided in this section.

(8)(a)
"Compensation earnable" for plan 1 members, means salaries or wages
earned during a payroll period for personal services and where the compensation
is not all paid in money, maintenance compensation shall be included upon the
basis of the schedules established by the member's employer.

(i) "Compensation
earnable" for plan 1 members also includes the following actual or imputed
payments, which are not paid for personal services:

(A) Retroactive
payments to an individual by an employer on reinstatement of the employee in a
position, or payments by an employer to an individual in lieu of reinstatement
in a position which are awarded or granted as the equivalent of the salary or
wage which the individual would have earned during a payroll period shall be
considered compensation earnable and the individual shall receive the
equivalent service credit;

(B) If a leave of
absence is taken by an individual for the purpose of serving in the state
legislature, the salary which would have been received for the position from
which the leave of absence was taken, shall be considered as compensation
earnable if the employee's contribution is paid by the employee and the
employer's contribution is paid by the employer or employee;

(C) Assault pay only as
authorized by RCW 27.04.100, 72.01.045, and 72.09.240;

(D) Compensation that a
member would have received but for a disability occurring in the line of duty
only as authorized by RCW 41.40.038;

(E) Compensation that a
member receives due to participation in the leave sharing program only as
authorized by RCW 41.04.650 through 41.04.670; and

(F) Compensation that a
member receives for being in standby status. For the purposes of this section,
a member is in standby status when not being paid for time actually worked and
the employer requires the member to be prepared to report immediately for work,
if the need arises, although the need may not arise.

(ii) "Compensation
earnable" does not include:

(A) Remuneration for
unused sick leave authorized under RCW 41.04.340, 28A.400.210, or 28A.310.490;

(B) Remuneration for
unused annual leave in excess of thirty days as authorized by RCW 43.01.044 and
43.01.041;

(C) Housing
allowances authorized in section 2 of this act.

(b) "Compensation
earnable" for plan 2 and plan 3 members, means salaries or wages earned by
a member during a payroll period for personal services, including overtime
payments, and shall include wages and salaries deferred under provisions
established pursuant to sections 403(b), 414(h), and 457 of the United States
Internal Revenue Code, but shall exclude nonmoney maintenance compensation and
lump sum or other payments for deferred annual sick leave, unused accumulated
vacation, unused accumulated annual leave, ((or)) any form of severance
pay, and housing allowances authorized in section 2 of this act.

"Compensation
earnable" for plan 2 and plan 3 members also includes the following actual
or imputed payments, which are not paid for personal services:

(i) Retroactive
payments to an individual by an employer on reinstatement of the employee in a
position, or payments by an employer to an individual in lieu of reinstatement
in a position which are awarded or granted as the equivalent of the salary or
wage which the individual would have earned during a payroll period shall be
considered compensation earnable to the extent provided above, and the
individual shall receive the equivalent service credit;

(ii) In any year in
which a member serves in the legislature, the member shall have the option of
having such member's compensation earnable be the greater of:

(A) The compensation
earnable the member would have received had such member not served in the
legislature; or

(B) Such member's
actual compensation earnable received for nonlegislative public employment and
legislative service combined. Any additional contributions to the retirement
system required because compensation earnable under (b)(ii)(A) of this
subsection is greater than compensation earnable under (b)(ii)(B) of this
subsection shall be paid by the member for both member and employer
contributions;

(iii) Assault pay only
as authorized by RCW 27.04.100, 72.01.045, and 72.09.240;

(iv) Compensation that
a member would have received but for a disability occurring in the line of duty
only as authorized by RCW 41.40.038;

(v) Compensation that a
member receives due to participation in the leave sharing program only as
authorized by RCW 41.04.650 through 41.04.670; and

(vi) Compensation that
a member receives for being in standby status. For the purposes of this
section, a member is in standby status when not being paid for time actually
worked and the employer requires the member to be prepared to report
immediately for work, if the need arises, although the need may not arise.

(9)(a)
"Service" for plan 1 members, except as provided in RCW 41.40.088,
means periods of employment in an eligible position or positions for one or
more employers rendered to any employer for which compensation is paid, and
includes time spent in office as an elected or appointed official of an
employer. Compensation earnable earned in full time work for seventy hours or
more in any given calendar month shall constitute one service credit month
except as provided in RCW 41.40.088. Compensation earnable earned for less than
seventy hours in any calendar month shall constitute one-quarter service credit
month of service except as provided in RCW 41.40.088. Only service credit
months and one-quarter service credit months shall be counted in the
computation of any retirement allowance or other benefit provided for in this
chapter. Any fraction of a year of service shall be taken into account in the
computation of such retirement allowance or benefits. Time spent in standby
status, whether compensated or not, is not service.

(i) Service by a state
employee officially assigned by the state on a temporary basis to assist
another public agency, shall be considered as service as a state employee:
PROVIDED, That service to any other public agency shall not be considered
service as a state employee if such service has been used to establish benefits
in any other public retirement system.

(ii) An individual
shall receive no more than a total of twelve service credit months of service
during any calendar year. If an individual is employed in an eligible position
by one or more employers the individual shall receive no more than one service credit
month during any calendar month in which multiple service for seventy or more
hours is rendered.

(iii) A school district
employee may count up to forty-five days of sick leave as creditable service
solely for the purpose of determining eligibility to retire under RCW 41.40.180
as authorized by RCW 28A.400.300. For purposes of plan 1 "forty-five
days" as used in RCW 28A.400.300 is equal to two service credit months.
Use of less than forty-five days of sick leave is creditable as allowed under
this subsection as follows:

(A) Less than
twenty-two days equals one-quarter service credit month;

(B) Twenty-two days
equals one service credit month;

(C) More than
twenty-two days but less than forty-five days equals one and one-quarter
service credit month.

(b) "Service"
for plan 2 and plan 3 members, means periods of employment by a member in an
eligible position or positions for one or more employers for which compensation
earnable is paid. Compensation earnable earned for ninety or more hours in any
calendar month shall constitute one service credit month except as provided in
RCW 41.40.088. Compensation earnable earned for at least seventy hours but
less than ninety hours in any calendar month shall constitute one-half service
credit month of service. Compensation earnable earned for less than seventy
hours in any calendar month shall constitute one-quarter service credit month
of service. Time spent in standby status, whether compensated or not, is not
service.

Any fraction of a year
of service shall be taken into account in the computation of such retirement
allowance or benefits.

(i) Service in any
state elective position shall be deemed to be full time service, except that
persons serving in state elective positions who are members of the Washington
school employees' retirement system, teachers' retirement system, or law
enforcement officers' and fire fighters' retirement system at the time of
election or appointment to such position may elect to continue membership in
the Washington school employees' retirement system, teachers' retirement
system, or law enforcement officers' and fire fighters' retirement system.

(ii) A member shall
receive a total of not more than twelve service credit months of service for
such calendar year. If an individual is employed in an eligible position by
one or more employers the individual shall receive no more than one service
credit month during any calendar month in which multiple service for ninety or
more hours is rendered.

(iii) Up to forty-five
days of sick leave may be creditable as service solely for the purpose of
determining eligibility to retire under RCW 41.40.180 as authorized by RCW
28A.400.300. For purposes of plan 2 and plan 3 "forty-five days" as
used in RCW 28A.400.300 is equal to two service credit months. Use of less
than forty-five days of sick leave is creditable as allowed under this
subsection as follows:

(A) Less than eleven
days equals one-quarter service credit month;

(B) Eleven or more days
but less than twenty-two days equals one-half service credit month;

(C) Twenty-two days
equals one service credit month;

(D) More than
twenty-two days but less than thirty-three days equals one and one-quarter
service credit month;

(E) Thirty-three or
more days but less than forty-five days equals one and one-half service credit
month.

(10) "Service
credit year" means an accumulation of months of service credit which is
equal to one when divided by twelve.

(11) "Service
credit month" means a month or an accumulation of months of service credit
which is equal to one.

(12) "Prior
service" means all service of an original member rendered to any employer
prior to October 1, 1947.

(13) "Membership
service" means:

(a) All service
rendered, as a member, after October 1, 1947;

(b) All service after October
1, 1947, to any employer prior to the time of its admission into the retirement
system for which member and employer contributions, plus interest as required
by RCW 41.50.125, have been paid under RCW 41.40.056 or 41.40.057;

(c) Service not to exceed
six consecutive months of probationary service rendered after April 1, 1949,
and prior to becoming a member, in the case of any member, upon payment in full
by such member of the total amount of the employer's contribution to the
retirement fund which would have been required under the law in effect when
such probationary service was rendered if the member had been a member during
such period, except that the amount of the employer's contribution shall be
calculated by the director based on the first month's compensation earnable as
a member;

(d) Service not to
exceed six consecutive months of probationary service, rendered after October
1, 1947, and before April 1, 1949, and prior to becoming a member, in the case
of any member, upon payment in full by such member of five percent of such
member's salary during said period of probationary service, except that the
amount of the employer's contribution shall be calculated by the director based
on the first month's compensation earnable as a member.

(14)(a)
"Beneficiary" for plan 1 members, means any person in receipt of a
retirement allowance, pension or other benefit provided by this chapter.

(b)
"Beneficiary" for plan 2 and plan 3 members, means any person in
receipt of a retirement allowance or other benefit provided by this chapter
resulting from service rendered to an employer by another person.

(15) "Regular
interest" means such rate as the director may determine.

(16) "Accumulated
contributions" means the sum of all contributions standing to the credit
of a member in the member's individual account, including any amount paid under
RCW 41.50.165(2), together with the regular interest thereon.

(17)(a) "Average
final compensation" for plan 1 members, means the annual average of the
greatest compensation earnable by a member during any consecutive two year
period of service credit months for which service credit is allowed; or if the
member has less than two years of service credit months then the annual average
compensation earnable during the total years of service for which service
credit is allowed.

(b) "Average final
compensation" for plan 2 and plan 3 members, means the member's average
compensation earnable of the highest consecutive sixty months of service credit
months prior to such member's retirement, termination, or death. Periods
constituting authorized leaves of absence may not be used in the calculation of
average final compensation except under RCW 41.40.710(2).

(18) "Final
compensation" means the annual rate of compensation earnable by a member
at the time of termination of employment.

(19)
"Annuity" means payments for life derived from accumulated
contributions of a member. All annuities shall be paid in monthly
installments.

(20)
"Pension" means payments for life derived from contributions made by
the employer. All pensions shall be paid in monthly installments.

(21) "Retirement
allowance" means the sum of the annuity and the pension.

(22) "Employee"
or "employed" means a person who is providing services for
compensation to an employer, unless the person is free from the employer's
direction and control over the performance of work. The department shall adopt
rules and interpret this subsection consistent with common law.

(23) "Actuarial
equivalent" means a benefit of equal value when computed upon the basis of
such mortality and other tables as may be adopted by the director.

(24)
"Retirement" means withdrawal from active service with a retirement
allowance as provided by this chapter.

(25) "Eligible
position" means:

(a) Any position that,
as defined by the employer, normally requires five or more months of service a
year for which regular compensation for at least seventy hours is earned by the
occupant thereof. For purposes of this chapter an employer shall not define
"position" in such a manner that an employee's monthly work for that
employer is divided into more than one position;

(b) Any position
occupied by an elected official or person appointed directly by the governor,
or appointed by the chief justice of the supreme court under RCW 2.04.240(2) or
2.06.150(2), for which compensation is paid.

(26) "Ineligible
position" means any position which does not conform with the requirements set
forth in subsection (25) of this section.

(27) "Leave of
absence" means the period of time a member is authorized by the employer
to be absent from service without being separated from membership.

(28) "Totally
incapacitated for duty" means total inability to perform the duties of a
member's employment or office or any other work for which the member is
qualified by training or experience.

(29)
"Retiree" means any person who has begun accruing a retirement
allowance or other benefit provided by this chapter resulting from service
rendered to an employer while a member.

(30)
"Director" means the director of the department.

(31) "State
elective position" means any position held by any person elected or
appointed to statewide office or elected or appointed as a member of the
legislature.

(32) "State
actuary" or "actuary" means the person appointed pursuant to RCW
44.44.010(2).

(33) "Plan 1"
means the public employees' retirement system, plan 1 providing the benefits
and funding provisions covering persons who first became members of the system
prior to October 1, 1977.

(34) "Plan 2"
means the public employees' retirement system, plan 2 providing the benefits
and funding provisions covering persons who first became members of the system
on and after October 1, 1977, and are not included in plan 3.

(35) "Plan 3"
means the public employees' retirement system, plan 3 providing the benefits
and funding provisions covering persons who:

(a) First become a
member on or after:

(i) March 1, 2002, and
are employed by a state agency or institute of higher education and who did not
choose to enter plan 2; or

(ii) September 1, 2002,
and are employed by other than a state agency or institute of higher education
and who did not choose to enter plan 2; or

(b) Transferred to plan
3 under RCW 41.40.795.

(36) "Index"
means, for any calendar year, that year's annual average consumer price index,
Seattle, Washington area, for urban wage earners and clerical workers, all
items, compiled by the bureau of labor statistics, United States department of
labor.

(37) "Index
A" means the index for the year prior to the determination of a
postretirement adjustment.

(38) "Index
B" means the index for the year prior to index A.

(39) "Index
year" means the earliest calendar year in which the index is more than
sixty percent of index A.

(40) "Adjustment
ratio" means the value of index A divided by index B.

(41) "Annual
increase" means, initially, fifty-nine cents per month per year of service
which amount shall be increased each July 1st by three percent, rounded to the
nearest cent.

(42) "Separation
from service" occurs when a person has terminated all employment with an
employer.

(43) "Member
account" or "member's account" for purposes of plan 3 means the
sum of the contributions and earnings on behalf of the member in the defined
contribution portion of plan 3.

Sec. 9. RCW 41.35.010 and 2001 c
180 s 3 are each amended to read as follows:

The definitions in this
section apply throughout this chapter, unless the context clearly requires
otherwise:

(1) "Retirement
system" means the Washington school employees' retirement system provided
for in this chapter.

(2)
"Department" means the department of retirement systems created in
chapter 41.50 RCW.

(3) "State
treasurer" means the treasurer of the state of Washington.

(4)
"Employer," for plan 2 and plan 3 members, means a school district or
an educational service district.

(5) "Member"
means any employee included in the membership of the retirement system, as
provided for in RCW 41.35.030.

(6)(a)
"Compensation earnable" for plan 2 and plan 3 members, means salaries
or wages earned by a member during a payroll period for personal services,
including overtime payments, and shall include wages and salaries deferred
under provisions established pursuant to sections 403(b), 414(h), and 457 of
the United States internal revenue code, but shall exclude nonmoney maintenance
compensation and lump sum or other payments for deferred annual sick leave,
unused accumulated vacation, unused accumulated annual leave, ((or)) any
form of severance pay, and housing allowances authorized under section 2 of
this act.

(b) "Compensation
earnable" for plan 2 and plan 3 members also includes the following actual
or imputed payments, which are not paid for personal services:

(i) Retroactive
payments to an individual by an employer on reinstatement of the employee in a
position, or payments by an employer to an individual in lieu of reinstatement,
which are awarded or granted as the equivalent of the salary or wage which the
individual would have earned during a payroll period shall be considered
compensation earnable to the extent provided in this subsection, and the
individual shall receive the equivalent service credit;

(ii) In any year in
which a member serves in the legislature, the member shall have the option of
having such member's compensation earnable be the greater of:

(A) The compensation
earnable the member would have received had such member not served in the
legislature; or

(B) Such member's
actual compensation earnable received for nonlegislative public employment and
legislative service combined. Any additional contributions to the retirement
system required because compensation earnable under (b)(ii)(A) of this
subsection is greater than compensation earnable under this (b)(ii)(B) of this
subsection shall be paid by the member for both member and employer
contributions;

(iii) Assault pay only
as authorized by RCW 27.04.100, 72.01.045, and 72.09.240;

(iv) Compensation that
a member would have received but for a disability occurring in the line of duty
only as authorized by RCW 41.40.038;

(v) Compensation that a
member receives due to participation in the leave sharing program only as
authorized by RCW 41.04.650 through 41.04.670; and

(vi) Compensation that
a member receives for being in standby status. For the purposes of this
section, a member is in standby status when not being paid for time actually
worked and the employer requires the member to be prepared to report
immediately for work, if the need arises, although the need may not arise.

(7) "Service"
for plan 2 and plan 3 members means periods of employment by a member in an
eligible position or positions for one or more employers for which compensation
earnable is paid. Compensation earnable earned for ninety or more hours in any
calendar month shall constitute one service credit month except as provided in
RCW 41.35.180. Compensation earnable earned for at least seventy hours but
less than ninety hours in any calendar month shall constitute one-half service
credit month of service. Compensation earnable earned for less than seventy
hours in any calendar month shall constitute one-quarter service credit month
of service. Time spent in standby status, whether compensated or not, is not
service.

Any fraction of a year
of service shall be taken into account in the computation of such retirement
allowance or benefits.

(a) Service in any
state elective position shall be deemed to be full-time service.

(b) A member shall
receive a total of not more than twelve service credit months of service for
such calendar year. If an individual is employed in an eligible position by
one or more employers the individual shall receive no more than one service
credit month during any calendar month in which multiple service for ninety or
more hours is rendered.

(c) For purposes of
plan 2 and 3 "forty-five days" as used in RCW 28A.400.300 is equal to
two service credit months. Use of less than forty-five days of sick leave is
creditable as allowed under this subsection as follows:

(i) Less than eleven
days equals one-quarter service credit month;

(ii) Eleven or more
days but less than twenty-two days equals one-half service credit month;

(iii) Twenty-two days
equals one service credit month;

(iv) More than
twenty-two days but less than thirty-three days equals one and one-quarter
service credit month; and

(v) Thirty-three or more
days but less than forty-five days equals one and one-half service credit
month.

(8) "Service
credit year" means an accumulation of months of service credit which is
equal to one when divided by twelve.

(9) "Service
credit month" means a month or an accumulation of months of service credit
which is equal to one.

(10) "Membership
service" means all service rendered as a member.

(11)
"Beneficiary" for plan 2 and plan 3 members means any person in
receipt of a retirement allowance or other benefit provided by this chapter
resulting from service rendered to an employer by another person.

(12) "Regular
interest" means such rate as the director may determine.

(13) "Accumulated
contributions" means the sum of all contributions standing to the credit
of a member in the member's individual account, including any amount paid under
RCW 41.50.165(2), together with the regular interest thereon.

(14) "Average
final compensation" for plan 2 and plan 3 members means the member's
average compensation earnable of the highest consecutive sixty months of
service credit months prior to such member's retirement, termination, or
death. Periods constituting authorized leaves of absence may not be used in
the calculation of average final compensation except under RCW 41.40.710(2).

(15) "Final
compensation" means the annual rate of compensation earnable by a member
at the time of termination of employment.

(16)
"Annuity" means payments for life derived from accumulated
contributions of a member. All annuities shall be paid in monthly
installments.

(17)
"Pension" means payments for life derived from contributions made by
the employer. All pensions shall be paid in monthly installments.

(18) "Retirement
allowance" for plan 2 and plan 3 members means monthly payments to a
retiree or beneficiary as provided in this chapter.

(19)
"Employee" or "employed" means a person who is providing
services for compensation to an employer, unless the person is free from the
employer's direction and control over the performance of work. The department
shall adopt rules and interpret this subsection consistent with common law.

(20) "Actuarial
equivalent" means a benefit of equal value when computed upon the basis of
such mortality and other tables as may be adopted by the director.

(21)
"Retirement" means withdrawal from active service with a retirement
allowance as provided by this chapter.

(22) "Eligible
position" means any position that, as defined by the employer, normally
requires five or more months of service a year for which regular compensation
for at least seventy hours is earned by the occupant thereof. For purposes of
this chapter an employer shall not define "position" in such a manner
that an employee's monthly work for that employer is divided into more than one
position.

(23) "Ineligible
position" means any position which does not conform with the requirements
set forth in subsection (22) of this section.

(24) "Leave of
absence" means the period of time a member is authorized by the employer
to be absent from service without being separated from membership.

(25)
"Retiree" means any person who has begun accruing a retirement
allowance or other benefit provided by this chapter resulting from service
rendered to an employer while a member.

(26)
"Director" means the director of the department.

(27) "State
elective position" means any position held by any person elected or
appointed to statewide office or elected or appointed as a member of the
legislature.

(28) "State
actuary" or "actuary" means the person appointed pursuant to RCW
44.44.010(2).

(29) "Plan 2"
means the Washington school employees' retirement system plan 2 providing the
benefits and funding provisions covering persons who first became members of
the public employees' retirement system on and after October 1, 1977, and
transferred to the Washington school employees' retirement system under RCW
41.40.750.

(30) "Plan 3"
means the Washington school employees' retirement system plan 3 providing the
benefits and funding provisions covering persons who first became members of
the system on and after September 1, 2000, or who transfer from plan 2 under
RCW 41.35.510.

(31) "Index"
means, for any calendar year, that year's annual average consumer price index,
Seattle, Washington area, for urban wage earners and clerical workers, all
items, compiled by the bureau of labor statistics, United States department of
labor.

(32) "Index
A" means the index for the year prior to the determination of a
postretirement adjustment.

(33) "Index
B" means the index for the year prior to index A.

(34) "Adjustment
ratio" means the value of index A divided by index B.

(35) "Separation
from service" occurs when a person has terminated all employment with an
employer.

(36) "Member
account" or "member's account" for purposes of plan 3 means the
sum of the contributions and earnings on behalf of the member in the defined
contribution portion of plan 3.

(37)
"Classified employee" means an employee of a school district or an
educational service district who is not eligible for membership in the
teachers' retirement system established under chapter 41.32 RCW.

---
END ---