BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF
WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec.
1. The state of Washington
is committed to building a second bridge over the Tacoma Narrows using the most
efficient methods possible to deliver this critical transportation project that
is essential for public safety and welfare. While recognizing that users will
pay the majority of the construction costs in the form of tolls, the
legislature intends to keep those tolls as low as possible. The Tacoma Narrows
bridge plan approved by voters clearly provided for a state contribution to pay
for the construction of the approaches to the bridge so that toll payers would
be responsible for paying only for the bridge itself. The legislature hereby
reaffirms its intent to provide an appropriation sufficient to meet that
commitment made to voters on the Tacoma Narrows bridge advisory ballot.

Sec. 2. 2001 2nd sp.s. c 14 s
217 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:

FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF
TRANSPORTATION‑-IMPROVEMENTS‑-PROGRAM I

Motor Vehicle Account‑-State
Appropriation..... $ 508,936,000

Motor Vehicle Account‑-Federal
Appropriation... $ 219,538,000

Motor Vehicle Account‑-Private/Local

Appropriation.............................. $ 40,904,000

Special Category C Account‑-State

Appropriation.............................. $ 72,608,000

Multimodal Transportation
Account‑-State

Appropriation.............................. $ 4,880,000

TOTAL
APPROPRIATION................. $ 846,866,000

The appropriations in
this section are provided for the location, design, right of way acquisition,
or construction of state highway projects designated as improvements under RCW
47.05.030. The appropriations in this section are subject to the following
conditions and limitations and specified amounts are provided solely for that
activity:

(1) The special
category C account‑-state appropriation of $72,608,000 includes
$63,500,000 in proceeds from the sale of bonds authorized in RCW 47.10.812.
The transportation commission may authorize the use of current revenues
available to the department of transportation in lieu of bond proceeds for any
part of the state appropriation.

(2) The department
shall report December 1st and June 1st of each year to the senate and the house
of representatives transportation committees and the office of financial
management on the timing and the scope of work being performed for the regional
transit authority known as sound transit. This report shall provide a
description of all department activities related to the regional transit
authority including investments in state‑owned infrastructure.

(3) The motor vehicle
account‑-state appropriation includes $391,637,000 in proceeds from the
sale of bonds authorized by RCW 47.10.843. The transportation commission may
authorize the use of current revenues available to the department of
transportation in lieu of bond proceeds for any part of the state
appropriation.

(4) At least
$554,714,000 of the total appropriation is provided for the construction phase
of the improvement program.

(5) $4,880,000 of the
multimodal transportation account--state appropriation is provided solely for
the state program share of freight mobility projects as identified by the
freight mobility strategic investment board.

(6) The motor vehicle
account--state appropriation includes $3,898,000 in unexpended proceeds from
the January 2001 bond sale authorized in RCW 47.10.834 for the Tacoma Narrows
bridge project. The transportation commission may authorize the use of current
revenues available to the department of transportation in-lieu of bond proceeds
for any part of the state appropriation.

(7) The
motor vehicle account‑-state appropriation includes $47,682,000 for the
state contribution to the design, right of way, and construction of the
voter-approved Tacoma Narrows bridge project. This appropriation is made in
satisfaction of the commitment made to the voters who approved the project that
an amount sufficient to pay for the approaches to the bridge would be provided
by the state rather than the toll payers.

---
END ---