BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF
WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec.
1. (1) The portion of
statements, writings, or benevolent gestures expressing sympathy or a general
sense of benevolence relating to the pain, suffering, or death of a person
involved in an accident, and made to that person or to the family of that
person, shall be inadmissible as evidence in a civil action. A statement of
fault, however, which is part of, or in addition to, any of the above shall not
be made inadmissible by this section.

(2) For purposes of
this section:

(a)
"Accident" means an occurrence resulting in injury or death to one or
more persons that is not the result of willful action by a party.

(b) "Benevolent
gestures" means actions that convey a sense of compassion or commiseration
emanating from humane impulses.

(c) "Family"
means the spouse, parent, grandparent, stepmother, stepfather, child,
grandchild, brother, sister, half brother, half sister, adopted child of a
parent, or spouse's parents of an injured party.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 2. Section 1 of this act
constitutes a new chapter in Title 5 RCW.

---
END ---