BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF
WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec.
1. The legislature finds
that family and medical leave is designed to help working people fulfill both
their work and family responsibilities. The legislature also finds that, when
an individual who takes family and medical leave subsequently becomes eligible
to receive unemployment compensation, the maximum benefits payable to the
individual are decreased and the weekly benefit amount payable to the
individual may be decreased. The legislature intends to eliminate these
unintended consequences of taking family and medical leave.

Sec. 2. RCW 50.20.170 and 1945 c
35 s 85 are each amended to read as follows:

(1)(a) Subject to
(b) of this subsection, an individual who has received an initial
determination finding that he is potentially entitled to receive waiting period
credit or benefits shall, during the benefit year, be given waiting period
credit or be paid benefits in accordance with such initial determination for
any week with respect to which the conditions of eligibility for such credit or
benefits, as prescribed by this title, are met, unless the individual is denied
waiting period credit or benefits under the disqualification provisions of this
title.

(b) An individual
who has received an initial determination under (a) of this subsection must be
notified in writing that if he or she has taken unpaid family and medical leave
of six or more weeks, whether taken consecutively or intermittently, during his
or her base year, the individual may be entitled to a redetermination of the
amount of benefits payable. The notice must include the method by which the
claimant may request a redetermination under this subsection. If an eligible
claimant requests the redetermination, the department must reevaluate the
claimant's base year as provided in RCW 50.04.020(2)(b).

(2) All benefits
shall be paid through employment offices in accordance with such regulations as
the commissioner may prescribe.

Sec. 3. RCW 50.04.020 and 1994 c
3 s 1 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) "Base
year" with respect to each individual, shall mean ((either)) the
first four of the last five completed calendar quarters ((or)),
the last four completed calendar quarters immediately preceding the first day
of the individual's benefit year, or, if applicable under subsection (2) of
this section, an additional base year.

(2)(a) Except as
provided in (b) of this subsection, for the purposes of establishing a
benefit year, the department shall initially use the first four of the last
five completed calendar quarters as the base year. If a benefit year is not
established using the first four of the last five calendar quarters as the base
year, the department shall use the last four completed calendar quarters as the
base year.

(b) If a claimant
requests a redetermination under RCW 50.20.170(1)(b), the department shall
evaluate an additional base year, using the four quarters with the highest
wages in the last six completed calendar quarters. The base year, for the
purposes of establishing the claimant's benefit year, must be either the base
year initially used under (a) of this subsection or the additional base year
used under this subsection, whichever base year entitles the claimant to the
higher maximum benefits under RCW 50.20.120(1). However, any benefit year
established under this subsection may not use calendar quarters that were
previously used to establish a prior benefit year.

(3) Computations
using the last four completed calendar quarters shall be based on available
wage items processed as of the close of business on the day preceding the date
of application. The department shall promptly contact employers to request
assistance in obtaining wage information for the last completed calendar
quarter if it has not been reported at the time of initial application.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
4. A new section is added
to chapter 50.04 RCW to read as follows:

"Family and
medical leave" means leave taken under either the federal family and
medical leave act of 1993 (Act of Feb. 5, 1993, P.L. 103-3, 107 Stat. 6) or the
state family leave law, chapter 49.78 RCW.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
5. If any part of this act
is found to be in conflict with federal requirements that are a prescribed
condition to the allocation of federal funds to the state or the eligibility of
employers in this state for federal unemployment tax credits, the conflicting
part of this act is inoperative solely to the extent of the conflict, and the
finding or determination does not affect the operation of the remainder of this
act. Rules adopted under this act must meet federal requirements that are a
necessary condition to the receipt of federal funds by the state or the
granting of federal unemployment tax credits to employers in this state.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 6. Sections 2 and 3 of this
act apply to claims that are effective on or after July 7, 2002.

---
END ---