BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF
WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec.
1. (1) Within existing
resources, the department of social and health services, in cooperation with
the office of the superintendent of public instruction, shall convene a working
group to prepare a plan for the legislature which addresses educational
stability and continuity for school age children who enter into short term
foster care. The working group shall be comprised of representatives from:

(a) The children's
administration of the department of social and health services;

(b) The special
education, transportation, and apportionment divisions of the office of the
superintendent of public instruction;

(c) The Washington
state institute for public policy;

(d) School districts;

(e) Organizations that
regularly advocate for foster children;

(f) Foster parents; and

(g) Other individuals
with related expertise as deemed appropriate by the working group.

(2)(a) The working
group shall develop a plan for assuring that the best interests of the child
are a primary consideration in the school placement of a child in short‑term
foster care. The plan must:

(i) Determine the
current status of school placement for children placed in short‑term
foster care;

(ii) Identify options
and possible funding sources from existing resources which could be made
available to assure that children placed in short‑term foster care are
able to remain in the school where they were enrolled prior to placement;

(iii) Submit
recommendations to the legislature by November 1, 2002, to assure the best
interest of the child receives primary consideration in school placement
decisions.

(b) The plan shall be
developed within existing resources.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
2. (1) The Nooksack Valley
and Mount Vernon school districts shall implement a pilot project within existing
resources to assist school age children in foster care fewer than seventy-five
days to continue attending the school where they were enrolled before entering
foster care. The pilot project shall be implemented as provided in this
section no later than March 30, 2002, and shall conclude June 30, 2003. Data
from the pilot project shall be compiled and submitted to the working group
established in section 1 of this act no later than July 30, 2002, and
periodically thereafter.

(2) A school age child
who enters foster care on or after March 30, 2002, shall, unless it is
determined to be not in the best interest of the child, continue attending the
school where she or he was enrolled before entering foster care,
notwithstanding the physical location of the child's principal abode. The best
interest of the child determination shall be made at the seventy-two hour
shelter care hearing, and reviewed at any subsequent shelter care hearing.

(3) The department of
social and health services, the school the child was attending prior to
entering foster care, and the school that serves the child's foster home shall
negotiate a plan for transporting the child to the school the child was
attending prior to entering foster care.

(4) If the department
of social and health services places a child in foster care, and the child does
not continue to attend the school the child was attending prior to entering
foster care, the department shall notify the school about the change.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 3. This act is necessary for
the immediate preservation of the public peace, health, or safety, or support
of the state government and its existing public institutions, and takes effect
immediately.

---
END ---