BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1. RCW 57.24.210 and 1996 c
230 s 912 are each amended to read as follows:

When there
is unincorporated territory containing less than one hundred acres and having
at least eighty percent of the boundaries of such area contiguous to two
municipal corporations providing either water or sewer service,
one of which is a water-sewer district, the legislative authority of either of
the contiguous municipal corporations may resolve to annex such territory to
that municipal corporation, provided a majority of the legislative authority of
the other contiguous municipal corporation concurs. In such event, the
municipal corporation resolving to annex such territory may proceed to effect
the annexation by complying with RCW 57.24.170 through 57.24.190. For purposes
of this section, "municipal corporation" means a water-sewer district,
city, or town.

--- END ---