BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF
WASHINGTON:

I. IMPLEMENTING REGIONAL TRANSPORTATION INVESTMENT PLANS

NEW SECTION. Sec.
101. FINDINGS. The legislature finds
that:

(1) The capacity of
many of Washington state's transportation facilities have failed to keep up
with the state's growth, particularly in major urban regions;

(2) The state cannot by
itself fund, in a timely way, many of the major capacity and other improvements
required on highways of statewide significance and for other regional
transportation projects in the state's largest urbanized areas;

(3) Providing a
transportation system that maintains efficient mobility for persons and freight
requires a partnership between the state, local, and regional governments and
the private sector;

(4) Timely construction
and development of significant transportation improvement projects can best be
achieved through enhanced funding options for governments at the city, county,
and regional levels. The legislature intends to use existing governments,
existing tax authority with enhancements, and existing authority for interlocal
cooperation among governments to address critical local, regional, and
statewide roadway and multimodal needs; and

(5) Voters must be
assured that locally generated moneys to address transportation projects will
remain within the taxing jurisdiction and that the tax revenues will be used to
address an identified list of projects and activities.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
102. DEFINITIONS. The
definitions in this section apply throughout this chapter unless the context
clearly requires otherwise.

(1) "Lead
agency" means a public agency designated by a county to plan, design, and
build a project.

(2)
"Transportation improvement projects" or "projects" means
projects contained in the transportation plan of the state or a regional
transportation planning organization. Projects may include new or existing
highways of statewide significance or local principal arterials of regional
significance, rail facilities, monorail facilities, public transportation
investments, ferry system capital improvements, and transportation demand
management programs. Projects may also include the operation, preservation,
and maintenance of these roadways and other facilities.

(3) "Regional
transportation investment plan" or "plan" means a plan to
develop, construct, and finance a transportation project or projects.

(4) "Regional
transportation planning organization" means that organization as defined
in chapter 47.80 RCW.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
103. RTPO PLANNING DUTIES‑-SUBMISSION
OF PLAN TO THE VOTERS‑-PROJECT IMPLEMENTATION. (1) If a transportation
revenue act becomes law in 2002, a county or counties choosing to implement a
plan under this chapter shall request that a regional transportation planning
organization of which they are a member develop a regional transportation
investment plan. The organization must adopt the plan within ninety days of
the county request.

(2) If a transportation
revenue act becomes law in 2002, in developing the plan the organization:

(a) Should consider
regional transportation equity and land use planning;

(b) Shall coordinate
its activities with the department of transportation, which shall provide
services, data, and personnel to assist in this planning as desired by the
organization;

(c) Shall coordinate
with local government entities within the boundaries of the requesting county
that engage in transportation planning;

(d) Shall develop
accurate cost forecasts for each project included in the plan with assistance
from the department and the lead agency. This project costing methodology must
include but not be limited to:

(i) Integration with a
range of revenue forecasts;

(ii) Estimated project
costs in constant dollars and year of expenditure dollars;

(iii) A range of
project costs reflected by the level of project design;

(iv) Project
contingencies;

(v) Identification of
mitigation costs; and

(vi) Project and plan
cash flow and bond analysis;

(e) Shall conduct
public meetings that are needed to assure active public participation in the
development of the plan.

(3) If a transportation
revenue act becomes law in 2002, the plan adopted by the organization must
include provisions:

(a) Providing for the
selection, development, construction, and financing of transportation
improvement projects;

(b) Providing for
improvements in mobility based on addressing transportation improvement
projects;

(c) Recommending the
appropriate mix of transportation investment choices to address the mobility
needs of the county;

(d) Providing that the
maximum amount possible of the funds raised will be used to fund projects in
the plan. Allowable costs include environmental improvements and mitigation.
The plan must minimize administrative costs; and

(e) Recommending
sources of revenue authorized by section 104 of this act and a financing plan
to fund transportation projects included in the plan. Any state funding for
projects developed under this chapter must be specifically provided for in
state law.

(4) If a transportation
revenue act becomes law in 2002, once adopted, the plan must be forwarded to
the county legislative authority or authorities for approval or rejection.
Before a county initiates the election process, the county shall provide notice
of the plan to each city and town within the district, the governor, the chairs
of the transportation committees of the legislature, the secretary of
transportation, and each legislator whose legislative district is partially or
wholly within the boundaries of the county.

(5) If a transportation
revenue act becomes law in 2002, if the plan fails under subsection (6) of this
section the regional transportation planning organization may redefine the
selected projects and the project and financing plan. The county or counties
may approve the new plan and resubmit it under subsections (6) through (8) of
this section.

(6) If a transportation
revenue act becomes law in 2002, if the county legislative authority approves
the plan, the county legislative authority shall:

(a) Draft a ballot
title;

(b) Give notice as
required by law for ballot measures; and

(c) Perform other
duties as required to put the plan before the voters of the county for their
approval or rejection as a single ballot proposition that approves the plan.

(7) If a transportation
revenue act becomes law in 2002, the electorate will be the voters voting
within the boundaries of the county. A simple majority of those voting on a
single proposition to approve the plan and impose the taxes and fees within
each county is required for approval.

(8) If a transportation
revenue act becomes law in 2002, and if the plan is approved by the voters and
involves more than one county, the counties must negotiate interlocal
agreements necessary to implement the plan.

(9) If a transportation
revenue act becomes law in 2002, after voter approval of the plan, the county
or counties shall enter into agreements with lead agencies as to who will
acquire, construct, or develop projects approved by the voters. The county or
counties shall negotiate reasonable terms and conditions to assist lead
agencies in funding projects. The overall plan of the county or counties must
leverage the county's or counties' financial contributions so that the state
and other revenue sources continue to fund major state‑owned congestion
relief and transportation capacity improvement projects.

(10) If a
transportation revenue act becomes law in 2002, a county may, after
consultation with the regional transportation planning organization, amend
projects in the plan as warranted without voter approval. However, increases
in the cost of a project, including a member county's share of the cost, that
exceed twenty percent must be addressed under section 107 of this act.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
104. TAXES AND FEES. (1) In
order to fund a regional transportation investment plan, a county may, upon approval
of the voters as provided in this chapter, impose some or all of the following
taxes:

(a) A sales and use
tax, as specified in section 206 of this act;

(b) A local option
vehicle license fee, as specified under section 211 of this act;

(c) A parking tax under
RCW 82.80.030;

(d) A local motor
vehicle excise tax under RCW 81.100.060 and chapter 81.104 RCW;

(e) A local option fuel
tax under RCW 82.80.010;

(f) An employer excise
tax under RCW 81.100.030;

(g) A sales and use tax
under RCW 82.14.045;

(h) A sales and use tax
under RCW 81.104.170; and

(i) Vehicle tolls, but
only on new or expanded facilities. Unless otherwise specified by law, the
department of transportation shall administer the collection of vehicle tolls
on designated facilities, and the state transportation commission, or its
successor, shall be the tolling authority.

(2) Taxes, fees, and
tolls may not be imposed without an affirmative vote of the majority of the
voters within the boundaries of the county voting on a ballot proposition as
set forth in section 103 (6) through (8) of this act. Revenues from these
taxes and fees may be used only to implement this chapter. A county may
contract with the state department of revenue or other appropriate entities for
administration and collection of any of the taxes or fees authorized in this
section.

(3) Existing statewide
motor vehicle fuel and special fuel taxes, at the distribution rates in effect
on January 1, 2001, are not intended to be altered by this chapter.

(4)(a) The state sales
tax imposed and collected under chapters 82.08 and 82.12 RCW, less any credits
allowed under chapter 82.14 RCW, on initial construction for any project to be
constructed under this chapter must be transferred to the project or identified
as a credit on the project to defray costs or pay debt service on that
project. In the case of a toll project, the transfer or credit must be used to
lower the overall cost of the project and thereby the amount or term of the
tolls.

(b) This transaction is
exempt from the requirements in RCW 43.135.035(4).

(c) Government entities
constructing projects under this chapter shall report the amount of state sales
or use tax covered under this subsection (4) to the department of revenue.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
105. REVENUE DISTRIBUTION.
The revenues generated under section 104 of this act must be distributed in the
following manner:

(1) Tolls collected on
state routes must be deposited in the motor vehicle fund for the use of the department
of transportation. Tolls on other facilities must be used to pay for those
facilities.

(2) Of the remaining
amount:

(a) Seventy percent
must be deposited in the regional transportation investment account. The
department of transportation and the transportation improvement board must use
the funds to implement projects identified in the regional transportation
investment plan;

(b) Fifteen percent
must be distributed to the county for transportation uses consistent with the
ballot proposition and adopted transportation and land use plans of the
jurisdiction spending the funds and consistent with any applicable and adopted
regional transportation plan for regional transportation planning areas;

(c) Fifteen percent
must be distributed to cities and towns within the county for transportation
uses consistent with the ballot proposition and with the adopted transportation
and land use plans of the jurisdiction spending the funds and consistent with
any applicable and adopted regional transportation plan for regional
transportation planning areas.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
106. DESIGN-BUILD. A county
may use the design‑build procedure defined in RCW 47.20.780 for projects
funded by it under this chapter. The requirements and limitations of RCW
47.20.780 and 47.20.785 do not apply to the projects under this chapter.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
107. PERFORMANCE CRITERIA FOR
REGIONAL PROJECT SELECTION. (1) The regional transportation planning
organization shall consider the following criteria for selecting projects to
improve corridor performance:

(a) Reduced level of
congestion and improved safety;

(b) Improved travel
time;

(c) Improved air
quality;

(d) Increased daily and
peak period person and vehicle trip capacity;

(e) Reduced person and
vehicle delay;

(f) Improved freight
mobility; and

(g) Cost-effectiveness
of the investment.

(2) These criteria
represent only minimum standards that must be considered in selecting
transportation improvement projects.

(3) The county shall
monitor and audit the progress and execution of projects to protect the
investment of the public. If a project cost exceeds its original cost by more
than twenty percent as identified in the plan:

(a) The county
legislative authority shall submit to the voters a ballot measure that
redefines the scope of the project, its schedule, or its costs. If the voters
fail to approve the redefined project, the county shall terminate work on that
project, except that the county may take reasonable steps to use, preserve, or
connect any improvement already constructed. The remainder of any funds that
would otherwise have been expended on the terminated project must first be used
to retire any outstanding debt attributable to the plan and then may be used to
implement the remainder of the plan.

(b) Alternatively, upon
adoption of a resolution by a two-thirds majority of the county legislative
authority:

(i) The county shall
submit to the voters a ballot measure that redefines the scope of the plan, its
projects, its schedule, or its costs. If the voters fail to approve the
redefined plan, the county shall terminate work on that plan, except that the
county may take reasonable steps to use, preserve, or connect any improvement
already constructed. The remainder of any funds must be used to retire any
outstanding debt attributable to the plan; or

(ii) The county may
elect to continue the project without submitting an additional ballot proposal
to the voters.

(4) To assure
accountability to the public for the timely construction of the transportation
improvement project or projects within cost projections, the county shall issue
a report, at least annually, to the public and copies of the report to
newspapers of record in the county. In the report, the county shall indicate
the status of project costs, project expenditures, revenues, and construction
schedules. The county may also include in its report progress towards meeting
the performance criteria provided under this chapter.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
108. WASHINGTON STATE
DEPARTMENT OF TRANSPORTATION ROLE. (1) The department shall designate an
office of dedicated staff and services to assist counties under this chapter.
The primary responsibility of the dedicated staff is to coordinate the design,
preliminary engineering, permitting, financing, and construction of projects in
which the state has a role and are under consideration by a county or counties.

(2) All of the powers
granted the department under Title 47 RCW relating to highway construction may,
at the request of a county participating in a plan, be used to implement a
regional transportation investment plan and construct transportation projects.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
109. DISSOLUTION. The county
legislative authority may terminate any taxes, fees, or tolls imposed under an
approved plan if it finds that the financing or debt service on the project or
series of projects constructed under this plan has been completed and paid.

II. FINANCE

NEW SECTION. Sec.
201. REGIONAL TRANSPORTATION
INVESTMENT ACCOUNT. A regional transportation investment account is created
in the custody of the state treasurer for each county funding projects under
chapter 36.-- RCW (sections 101 through 109 of this act). All money deposited
in a regional transportation investment account by each county will be used for
design, right of way acquisition, capital acquisition, construction, payment of
debt service associated with these activities, or the operation, maintenance,
and preservation of county funded projects developed under chapter 36.-- RCW
(sections 101 through 109 of this act). The account is subject to allotment
procedures under chapter 43.88 RCW and the department of transportation is the
administering agency for the account. The county must approve the allotments
before any expenditures may be made from the account. An appropriation is not
required for expenditures from this account.

Sec. 202. RCW 43.84.092 and 2001
2nd sp.s. c 14 s 608, 2001 c 273 s 6, 2001 c 141 s 3, and 2001 c 80 s 5 are
each reenacted and amended to read as follows:

INTEREST EARNINGS. (1)
All earnings of investments of surplus balances in the state treasury shall be
deposited to the treasury income account, which account is hereby established
in the state treasury.

(2) The treasury income
account shall be utilized to pay or receive funds associated with federal
programs as required by the federal cash management improvement act of 1990.
The treasury income account is subject in all respects to chapter 43.88 RCW,
but no appropriation is required for refunds or allocations of interest
earnings required by the cash management improvement act. Refunds of interest
to the federal treasury required under the cash management improvement act fall
under RCW 43.88.180 and shall not require appropriation. The office of
financial management shall determine the amounts due to or from the federal
government pursuant to the cash management improvement act. The office of
financial management may direct transfers of funds between accounts as deemed
necessary to implement the provisions of the cash management improvement act,
and this subsection. Refunds or allocations shall occur prior to the
distributions of earnings set forth in subsection (4) of this section.

(3) Except for the
provisions of RCW 43.84.160, the treasury income account may be utilized for
the payment of purchased banking services on behalf of treasury funds
including, but not limited to, depository, safekeeping, and disbursement
functions for the state treasury and affected state agencies. The treasury
income account is subject in all respects to chapter 43.88 RCW, but no appropriation
is required for payments to financial institutions. Payments shall occur prior
to distribution of earnings set forth in subsection (4) of this section.

(4) Monthly, the state
treasurer shall distribute the earnings credited to the treasury income
account. The state treasurer shall credit the general fund with all the
earnings credited to the treasury income account except:

(a) The following
accounts and funds shall receive their proportionate share of earnings based
upon each account's and fund's average daily balance for the period: The
capitol building construction account, the Cedar River channel construction and
operation account, the Central Washington University capital projects account,
the charitable, educational, penal and reformatory institutions account, the
common school construction fund, the county criminal justice assistance
account, the county sales and use tax equalization account, the data processing
building construction account, the deferred compensation administrative account,
the deferred compensation principal account, the department of retirement
systems expense account, the drinking water assistance account, the drinking
water assistance administrative account, the drinking water assistance
repayment account, the Eastern Washington University capital projects account,
the education construction fund, the emergency reserve fund, the federal forest
revolving account, the health services account, the public health services
account, the health system capacity account, the personal health services
account, the state higher education construction account, the higher education
construction account, the highway infrastructure account, the industrial
insurance premium refund account, the judges' retirement account, the judicial retirement
administrative account, the judicial retirement principal account, the local
leasehold excise tax account, the local real estate excise tax account, the
local sales and use tax account, the medical aid account, the mobile home park
relocation fund, the multimodal transportation account, the municipal criminal
justice assistance account, the municipal sales and use tax equalization
account, the natural resources deposit account, the oyster reserve land
account, the perpetual surveillance and maintenance account, the public
employees' retirement system plan 1 account, the public employees' retirement
system combined plan 2 and plan 3 account, the public health supplemental
account, the Puyallup tribal settlement account, regional transportation
investment accounts, the resource management cost account, the site closure
account, the special wildlife account, the state employees' insurance account,
the state employees' insurance reserve account, the state investment board
expense account, the state investment board commingled trust fund accounts, the
supplemental pension account, the teachers' retirement system plan 1 account,
the teachers' retirement system combined plan 2 and plan 3 account, the tobacco
prevention and control account, the tobacco settlement account, the
transportation infrastructure account, the tuition recovery trust fund, the
University of Washington bond retirement fund, the University of Washington
building account, the volunteer fire fighters' and reserve officers' relief and
pension principal fund, the volunteer fire fighters' and reserve officers'
administrative fund, the Washington fruit express account, the Washington
judicial retirement system account, the Washington law enforcement officers'
and fire fighters' system plan 1 retirement account, the Washington law
enforcement officers' and fire fighters' system plan 2 retirement account, the
Washington school employees' retirement system combined plan 2 and 3 account,
the Washington state health insurance pool account, the Washington state patrol
retirement account, the Washington State University building account, the
Washington State University bond retirement fund, the water pollution control
revolving fund, and the Western Washington University capital projects
account. Earnings derived from investing balances of the agricultural
permanent fund, the normal school permanent fund, the permanent common school
fund, the scientific permanent fund, and the state university permanent fund
shall be allocated to their respective beneficiary accounts. All earnings to
be distributed under this subsection (4)(a) shall first be reduced by the
allocation to the state treasurer's service fund pursuant to RCW 43.08.190.

(b) The following
accounts and funds shall receive eighty percent of their proportionate share of
earnings based upon each account's or fund's average daily balance for the
period: The aeronautics account, the aircraft search and rescue account, the
county arterial preservation account, the department of licensing services account,
the essential rail assistance account, the ferry bond retirement fund, the
grade crossing protective fund, the high capacity transportation account, the
highway bond retirement fund, the highway safety account, the motor vehicle
fund, the motorcycle safety education account, the pilotage account, the public
transportation systems account, the Puget Sound capital construction account,
the Puget Sound ferry operations account, the recreational vehicle account, the
rural arterial trust account, the safety and education account, the special
category C account, the state patrol highway account, the transportation
equipment fund, the transportation fund, the transportation improvement
account, the transportation improvement board bond retirement account, and the
urban arterial trust account.

(5) In conformance with
Article II, section 37 of the state Constitution, no treasury accounts or funds
shall be allocated earnings without the specific affirmative directive of this
section.

Sec. 203. RCW 81.104.140 and 1992
c 101 s 25 are each amended to read as follows:

HCT TAXES FOR REGIONAL
TRANSIT. (1) Agencies authorized ((to provide high capacity transportation
service, including transit agencies and regional transit authorities,)) under
this section are hereby granted dedicated funding sources for ((such))
high capacity transportation systems. These dedicated funding sources,
as set forth in RCW 81.104.150, 81.104.160, and 81.104.170, are authorized ((only))
for:

(a) Transit
agencies located in (((a) each county with a population of two hundred ten
thousand or more and (b) each county with a population of from one hundred
twenty‑five thousand to less than two hundred ten thousand except for
those counties that do not border a county with a population as described under
(a) of this subsection. In any county with a population of one million or more
or in any county having a population of four hundred thousand or more bordering
a county with a population of one million or more, these funding sources may be
imposed only by a regional transit authority)) a county that neither
participates in nor is eligible to participate in a regional transit authority;

(b) Regional transit
authorities;

(c) Counties that
dedicate the funds to developing capital facilities for high capacity
transportation systems as part of a regional transportation investment plan and
meet the following requirements:

(i) Counties that
participate in a regional transit authority must obtain the approval of the authority;

(ii) Counties that
do not participate in a regional transit authority must have a transit agency
within their boundaries and must obtain the approval of the affected transit
authority or authorities;

(iii) Counties may
only impose a tax authorized by this section to the extent that the maximum
amount of taxes authorized under this chapter have not been imposed.

(2) Agencies planning
to construct and operate a high capacity transportation system should also seek
other funds, including federal, state, local, and private sector assistance.

(3) Funding sources
should satisfy each of the following criteria to the greatest extent possible:

(a) Acceptability;

(b) Ease of
administration;

(c) Equity;

(d) Implementation
feasibility;

(e) Revenue reliability;
and

(f) Revenue yield.

(4) Agencies
participating in regional high capacity transportation system development are
authorized to levy and collect the following voter‑approved local option
funding sources:

(a) Employer tax as
provided in RCW 81.104.150, other than by counties under chapter 36.-- RCW
(sections 101 through 109 of this act);

(b) Special motor
vehicle excise tax as provided in RCW 81.104.160; and

(c) Sales and use tax
as provided in RCW 81.104.170.

Revenues from these
taxes may be used only to support those purposes prescribed in subsection (10)
of this section. Before the date of an election authorizing an agency to
impose any of the taxes enumerated in this section and authorized in RCW
81.104.150, 81.104.160, and 81.104.170, the agency must comply with the process
prescribed in RCW 81.104.100 (1) and (2) and 81.104.110. No construction on
exclusive right of way may occur before the requirements of RCW 81.104.100(3)
are met.

(5) Authorization in
subsection (4) of this section shall not adversely affect the funding authority
of transit agencies not provided for in this chapter. Local option funds may
be used to support implementation of interlocal agreements with respect to the
establishment of regional high capacity transportation service. Except when a
regional transit authority exists, local jurisdictions shall retain control
over moneys generated within their boundaries, although funds may be commingled
with those generated in other areas for planning, construction, and operation
of high capacity transportation systems as set forth in the agreements.

(6) Agencies planning
to construct ((and)) or operate high capacity transportation
systems may contract with the state for collection and transference of voter‑approved
local option revenue.

(7) Dedicated high
capacity transportation funding sources authorized in RCW 81.104.150,
81.104.160, and 81.104.170 shall be subject to voter approval by a simple
majority. A single ballot proposition may seek approval for one or more of the
authorized taxing sources. The ballot title shall reference the document
identified in subsection (8) of this section.

(8) Agencies shall
provide to the registered voters in the area a document describing the systems
plan and the financing plan set forth in RCW 81.104.100. It shall also
describe the relationship of the system to regional issues such as development
density at station locations and activity centers, and the interrelationship of
the system to adopted land use and transportation demand management goals
within the region. This document shall be provided to the voters at least
twenty days prior to the date of the election.

(9) For any election in
which voter approval is sought for a high capacity transportation system plan
and financing plan pursuant to RCW 81.104.040, a local voter's pamphlet shall
be produced as provided in chapter 29.81A RCW.

(10) Agencies providing
high capacity transportation service shall retain responsibility for revenue
encumbrance, disbursement, and bonding. Funds may be used for any purpose
relating to planning, construction, and operation of high capacity
transportation systems and commuter rail systems, personal rapid transit,
busways, bus sets, and entrained and linked buses.

(11) Eligible
transit agencies or counties within which there are transit agencies, and with
those agencies' approval, may choose to implement high capacity transportation
service as a joint effort across their respective jurisdictions. Eligible
entities may coordinate efforts to implement some or all of the dedicated
funding sources set forth in RCW 81.104.150, 81.104.160, and 81.104.170 to
accomplish this goal. Entities electing to coordinate efforts shall enter into
interlocal agreements specifying the terms of the coordination. The respective
county legislative authorities may choose to set forth a common ballot measure
and vote to authorize the dedicated funding sources. Eligible entities
include:

(a) Transit agencies
located in a county that is neither participating in, nor is eligible to
participate in, a regional transit authority; and

(b) Counties in
which there are transit agencies and that are implementing a regional
transportation investment plan as defined in section 102 of this act.

Sec. 204. RCW 81.104.160 and 1998
c 321 s 35 are each amended to read as follows:

HCT‑-MVET. (1)
Cities that operate transit systems, county transportation authorities,
metropolitan municipal corporations, public transportation benefit areas, ((and))
regional transit authorities, and counties, as part of a regional
transportation investment plan, may submit an authorizing proposition to
the voters, and if approved, may levy and collect ((an)) a motor
vehicle excise tax, at a rate approved by the voters, but not exceeding
eighty one-hundredths of one percent ((on)) of the value((,
under chapter 82.44 RCW,)) of every motor vehicle owned by a resident of
the taxing district, solely for the purpose of providing high capacity
transportation service, and for counties, as part of a regional
transportation investment plan, solely for the purpose of providing high
capacity transportation capital facilities or improvements. In any county
imposing a motor vehicle excise tax surcharge pursuant to RCW 81.100.060, the
maximum tax rate under this section shall be reduced to a rate equal to eighty
one-hundredths of one percent on the value less the equivalent motor vehicle
excise tax rate of the surcharge imposed pursuant to RCW 81.100.060. This rate
shall not apply to vehicles licensed under RCW 46.16.070 except vehicles with
an unladen weight of six thousand pounds or less, RCW 46.16.079, 46.16.085, or
46.16.090.

(2) An agency imposing
a tax under subsection (1) of this section may also impose a sales and use tax
solely for the purpose of providing high capacity transportation service, in
addition to the tax authorized by RCW 82.14.030, upon retail car rentals within
the agency's jurisdiction that are taxable by the state under chapters 82.08
and 82.12 RCW. The rate of tax shall not exceed 2.172 percent. The rate of
tax imposed under this subsection shall bear the same ratio to the 2.172
percent rate authorized that the rate imposed under subsection (1) of this
section bears to the rate authorized under subsection (1) of this section. The
base of the tax shall be the selling price in the case of a sales tax or the
rental value of the vehicle used in the case of a use tax. The revenue
collected under this subsection shall be used in the same manner as excise
taxes under subsection (1) of this section.

(3) The total
cumulative rate of tax that may be imposed under subsection (1) of this section
shall not exceed the maximum rate authorized under that subsection.

(4) The special
motor vehicle excise tax as provided in this section applies only when applying
for or renewing a vehicle registration under chapter 46.16 RCW. This tax will
be effective with the initial application and upon the registration renewal
date as provided by the department of licensing. This tax is effective for
counties under chapter 36.-- RCW (sections 101 through 109 of this act) only
for registration renewals.

(5) Agencies
imposing the special motor vehicle excise tax or initiating an exemption
process shall enter into a contract with the department of licensing for
collection of the tax. The contract must contain provisions that fully recover
the costs to the department of licensing for collection and administration of
the tax.

(6) Agencies
imposing the special motor vehicle excise tax shall delay the effective date of
the tax imposed by this section at least six months from the date of the final
certification of the vote to allow the department of licensing time to
implement the administration and collection of or exemption from the tax.

Sec. 205. RCW 81.104.170 and 1997
c 450 s 5 are each amended to read as follows:

HCT SALES TAX. (1)
Cities that operate transit systems, county transportation authorities,
metropolitan municipal corporations, public transportation benefit areas, ((and))
regional transit authorities, and counties, as part of a regional
transportation investment plan, may submit an authorizing proposition to
the voters and if approved by a majority of persons voting, fix and impose a
sales and use tax in accordance with the terms of this chapter, solely for the
purpose of providing high capacity transportation service, and for counties,
as part of a regional transportation investment plan, solely for the purpose of
providing high capacity transportation capital facilities or improvements.

(2) The tax
authorized pursuant to this section shall be in addition to the tax authorized
by RCW 82.14.030 and shall be collected from those persons who are taxable by
the state pursuant to chapters 82.08 and 82.12 RCW upon the occurrence of any
taxable event within the taxing district. The maximum rate of such tax shall
be approved by the voters and shall not exceed one percent of the selling price
(in the case of a sales tax) or value of the article used (in the case of a use
tax). The maximum rate of such tax that may be imposed shall not exceed nine‑tenths
of one percent in any county that imposes a tax under RCW 82.14.340, or within
a regional transit authority if any county within the authority imposes a tax
under RCW 82.14.340. The total cumulative rate that may be imposed under
this subsection (2) may not exceed the maximum rate authorized under this subsection.
The exemptions in RCW 82.08.820 and 82.12.820 are for the state portion of the
sales and use tax and do not extend to the tax authorized in this section.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
206. A new section is added
to chapter 82.14 RCW to read as follows:

SALES AND USE TAX. (1)
If a transportation revenue act becomes law in 2002, and if approved by the
majority of the voters within its boundaries voting on the ballot proposition,
a county, as part of a regional transportation investment plan, may impose a
sales and use tax of up to 0.5 percent of the selling price or value of the
article used in the case of a use tax.

(2) If a transportation
revenue act becomes law in 2002, the tax authorized by this section is in
addition to all other taxes imposed under this chapter and must be collected
from those persons who are taxable by the state under chapters 82.08 and 82.12
RCW upon the occurrence of any taxable event within the boundaries of the county.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
207. A new section is added
to chapter 43.135 RCW to read as follows:

PROJECT SALES AND USE
TAX CREDIT SHIFT. Any transfer or credit from the general fund of sales and
use tax paid on a transportation project being constructed by a county under a
regional transportation investment plan shall not require a corresponding
lowering of the state expenditure limit to reflect this shift for purposes of
RCW 43.135.035(4).

Sec. 208. RCW 82.14.045 and 2001 c
89 s 3 are each amended to read as follows:

TRANSIT SALES TAX. (1)
The legislative body of any city pursuant to RCW 35.92.060, of any county which
has created an unincorporated transportation benefit area pursuant to RCW 36.57.100
and 36.57.110, of any public transportation benefit area pursuant to RCW
36.57A.080 and 36.57A.090, of any county transportation authority established
pursuant to chapter 36.57 RCW, and of any metropolitan municipal corporation
within a county with a population of one million or more pursuant to chapter
35.58 RCW, and the legislative body of a county, where a public
transportation system is operating, as part of a regional transportation
investment plan for the purposes of implementing the plan and with the
permission of each municipality operating a public transportation system within
the county, may, by resolution or ordinance for the sole purpose of
providing funds for the operation, maintenance, or capital needs of public
transportation systems or public transportation limited to persons with special
needs under RCW 36.57.130 and 36.57A.180, and in lieu of the excise taxes
authorized by RCW 35.95.040, submit an authorizing proposition to the voters or
include such authorization in a proposition to perform the function of public
transportation or public transportation limited to persons with special needs
under RCW 36.57.130 and 36.57A.180, and if approved by a majority of persons
voting thereon, fix and impose a sales and use tax in accordance with the terms
of this chapter: PROVIDED, That no such legislative body shall impose such a
sales and use tax without submitting such an authorizing proposition to the
voters and obtaining the approval of a majority of persons voting thereon:
PROVIDED FURTHER, That where such a proposition is submitted by a county on
behalf of an unincorporated transportation benefit area, it shall be voted upon
by the voters residing within the boundaries of such unincorporated
transportation benefit area and, if approved, the sales and use tax shall be
imposed only within such area. Notwithstanding any provisions of this section
to the contrary, any county in which a county public transportation plan has
been adopted pursuant to RCW 36.57.070 and the voters of such county have
authorized the imposition of a sales and use tax pursuant to the provisions of
section 10, chapter 167, Laws of 1974 ex. sess., prior to July 1, 1975, shall
be authorized to fix and impose a sales and use tax as provided in this section
at not to exceed the rate so authorized without additional approval of the
voters of such county as otherwise required by this section.

The tax authorized
pursuant to this section shall be in addition to the tax authorized by RCW
82.14.030 and shall be collected from those persons who are taxable by the
state pursuant to chapters 82.08 and 82.12 RCW upon the occurrence of any
taxable event within such city, public transportation benefit area, county, or
metropolitan municipal corporation as the case may be. The rate of such tax
shall be one-tenth, two-tenths, three-tenths, four-tenths, five-tenths,
six-tenths, seven-tenths, eight-tenths, or nine-tenths of one percent of the
selling price (in the case of a sales tax) or value of the article used (in the
case of a use tax). The rate of such tax shall not exceed the rate authorized
by the voters unless such increase shall be similarly approved.

(2)(a) In the event a
metropolitan municipal corporation shall impose a sales and use tax pursuant to
this chapter no city, county which has created an unincorporated transportation
benefit area, public transportation benefit area authority, or county
transportation authority wholly within such metropolitan municipal corporation
shall be empowered to levy and/or collect taxes pursuant to RCW 35.58.273,
35.95.040, and/or 82.14.045, but nothing herein shall prevent such city or
county from imposing sales and use taxes pursuant to any other authorization.

(b) In the event a
county transportation authority shall impose a sales and use tax pursuant to
this section, no city, county which has created an unincorporated
transportation benefit area, public transportation benefit area, or
metropolitan municipal corporation, located within the territory of the
authority, shall be empowered to levy or collect taxes pursuant to RCW
35.58.273, 35.95.040, or 82.14.045.

(c) In the event a
public transportation benefit area shall impose a sales and use tax pursuant to
this section, no city, county which has created an unincorporated
transportation benefit area, or metropolitan municipal corporation, located
wholly or partly within the territory of the public transportation benefit
area, shall be empowered to levy or collect taxes pursuant to RCW 35.58.273,
35.95.040, or 82.14.045.

(d) The total
cumulative rate of tax that may be imposed under subsection (1) of this section
shall not exceed the maximum rate authorized under that subsection.

(3) Any local sales and
use tax revenue collected pursuant to this section by any city or by any county
for transportation purposes pursuant to RCW 36.57.100 and 36.57.110 shall not
be counted as locally generated tax revenues for the purposes of apportionment
and distribution, in the manner prescribed by chapter 82.44 RCW, of the
proceeds of the motor vehicle excise tax authorized pursuant to RCW 35.58.273,
except that the local sales and use tax revenue collected under this section by
a city with a population greater than sixty thousand that as of January 1,
1998, owns and operates a municipal public transportation system shall be
counted as locally generated tax revenues for the purposes of apportionment and
distribution, in the manner prescribed by chapter 82.44 RCW, of the proceeds of
the motor vehicle excise tax authorized under RCW 35.58.273 as follows:

(a) For fiscal year
2000, revenues collected under this section shall be counted as locally
generated tax revenues for up to 25 percent of the tax collected under RCW
35.58.273;

(b) For fiscal year
2001, revenues collected under this section shall be counted as locally
generated tax revenues for up to 50 percent of the tax collected under RCW
35.58.273;

(c) For fiscal year
2002, revenues collected under this section shall be counted as locally
generated tax revenues for up to 75 percent of the tax collected under RCW
35.58.273; and

(d) For fiscal year
2003 and thereafter, revenues collected under this section shall be counted as
locally generated tax revenues for up to 100 percent of the tax collected under
RCW 35.58.273.

Sec. 209. RCW 82.14.050 and 1999 c
165 s 14 are each amended to read as follows:

CONTRACTS FOR
COLLECTION OF SALES AND USE TAX. The counties, cities, and transportation
authorities under RCW 82.14.045 ((and)), public facilities
districts under chapter 36.100 and 35.57 RCW, and counties, under a regional
transportation investment plan shall contract, prior to the effective date
of a resolution or ordinance imposing a sales and use tax, the administration
and collection to the state department of revenue, which shall deduct a
percentage amount, as provided by contract, not to exceed two percent of the
taxes collected for administration and collection expenses incurred by the
department. The remainder of any portion of any tax authorized by this chapter
which is collected by the department of revenue shall be deposited by the state
department of revenue in the local sales and use tax account hereby created in
the state treasury. Moneys in the local sales and use tax account may be spent
only for distribution to counties, cities, transportation authorities, and
public facilities districts imposing a sales and use tax. All administrative
provisions in chapters 82.03, 82.08, 82.12, and 82.32 RCW, as they now exist or
may hereafter be amended, shall, insofar as they are applicable to state sales
and use taxes, be applicable to taxes imposed pursuant to this chapter. Except
as provided in RCW 43.08.190, all earnings of investments of balances in the
local sales and use tax account shall be credited to the local sales and use tax
account and distributed to the counties, cities, transportation authorities,
and public facilities districts monthly.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
210. A new section is added
to chapter 82.32 RCW to read as follows:

CREDIT ON SALES TAX ON
PROJECTS. (1) The tax imposed and collected under chapters 82.08 and 82.12
RCW, less any credits allowed under chapter 82.14 RCW, on initial construction
for a project to be constructed under chapter 36.-- RCW (sections 101 through
109 of this act), must be transferred to the project or identified as a credit
on the project to defray costs or pay debt service on that project. In the
case of a toll project, this transfer or credit must be used to lower the
overall cost of the project and thereby the amount or term of the tolls.

(2) This transaction is
exempt from the requirements in RCW 43.135.035(4).

(3) Government entities
constructing projects under chapter 36.-- RCW (sections 101 through 109 of this
act) shall report to the department the amount of state sales or use tax
covered under this section.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
211. A new section is added
to chapter 82.80 RCW to read as follows:

LOCAL OPTION VEHICLE
LICENSE FEE. (1) If a transportation revenue act becomes law in 2002, and upon
approval of a majority of the voters within its boundaries voting on the ballot
proposition, a county, as part of a regional transportation investment plan,
may set and impose an annual local option vehicle license fee of a uniform amount
of up to one hundred dollars per motor vehicle registered within the boundaries
of the region on every motor vehicle that is subject to license fees under RCW
46.16.0621 and for each vehicle that is subject to RCW 46.16.070 with a
declared gross weight of twelve thousand pounds or less and that is determined
by the department of licensing to be registered within the boundaries of the
county. Vehicles registered under chapter 46.87 RCW and the international
registration plan are exempt from the annual local option vehicle license fee
set forth in this section. The county may also exempt certain classes of
vehicles from the fee under this section. The department of licensing shall
administer and collect this fee on behalf of counties and remit this fee to the
county to implement the regional transportation investment plan.

(2) If a transportation
revenue act becomes law in 2002, the local option vehicle license fee applies
only when renewing a vehicle registration. This fee is effective upon the
registration renewal date as provided by the department of licensing.

(3) If a transportation
revenue act becomes law in 2002, a county imposing the local option vehicle
license fee or initiating an exemption process shall enter into a contract with
the department of licensing. The contract must contain provisions that fully
recover the costs to the department of licensing for collection and
administration of the fee.

(4) If a transportation
revenue act becomes law in 2002, a county imposing the local option fee shall
delay the effective date of the local option vehicle license fee imposed by
this section at least six months from the date of the final certification of the
approval election to allow the department of licensing to implement the
administration and collection of or exemption from the fee.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
212. A new section is added
to chapter 47.56 RCW to read as follows:

AUTHORIZATION FOR
COUNTY TO IMPOSE TOLLS. Upon approval of a majority of the voters within its
boundaries voting on the ballot proposition, and only for the purposes
authorized in section 104(1)(i) of this act, a county may impose vehicle tolls
on state routes where improvements financed in whole or in part by a county
under a regional transportation investment plan reconstruct or add additional
lanes to a highway of statewide significance. The department shall administer
the collection of vehicle tolls on designated facilities unless otherwise
specified in law, and the state transportation commission, or its successor,
shall be the tolling authority.

Sec. 213. RCW 81.100.030 and 1991
c 363 s 153 are each amended to read as follows:

HIGH-OCCUPANCY VEHICLE
EMPLOYER TAX. (1) A county with a population of one million or more, or a
county with a population of from two hundred ten thousand to less than one
million that is adjoining a county with a population of one million or more, and
having within its boundaries existing or planned high-occupancy vehicle
lanes on the state highway system, or those same counties, as part of a
regional transportation investment plan, may, with voter approval impose an
excise tax of up to two dollars per employee per month on all employers or any
class or classes of employers, public and private, including the state located
in the agency's jurisdiction, measured by the number of full-time equivalent
employees. In no event may the total taxes imposed under this section
exceed two dollars per employee per month for any single employer. The
county imposing the tax authorized in this section may provide for exemptions
from the tax to such educational, cultural, health, charitable, or religious
organizations as it deems appropriate.

Counties may contract
with the state department of revenue or other appropriate entities for
administration and collection of the tax. Such contract shall provide for
deduction of an amount for administration and collection expenses.

(2) The tax shall not
apply to employment of a person when the employer has paid for at least half of
the cost of a transit pass issued by a transit agency for that employee, valid
for the period for which the tax would otherwise be owed.

(3) A county shall
adopt rules which exempt from all or a portion of the tax any employer that has
entered into an agreement with the county that is designed to reduce the
proportion of employees who drive in single-occupant vehicles during peak
commuting periods in proportion to the degree that the agreement is designed to
meet the goals for the employer's location adopted under RCW 81.100.040.

The agreement shall
include a list of specific actions that the employer will undertake to be
entitled to the exemption. Employers having an exemption from all or part of
the tax through this subsection shall annually certify to the county that the
employer is fulfilling the terms of the agreement. The exemption continues as
long as the employer is in compliance with the agreement.

If the tax authorized
in RCW 81.100.060 is also imposed ((by the county)), the total proceeds
from both tax sources each year shall not exceed the maximum amount which could
be collected under RCW 81.100.060.

Sec. 214. RCW 81.100.060 and 1998
c 321 s 34 are each amended to read as follows:

HIGH-OCCUPANCY VEHICLE
MOTOR VEHICLE EXCISE TAX. (1) A county with a population of one million
or more and a county with a population of from two hundred ten thousand to less
than one million that is adjoining a county with a population of one million or
more, having within their boundaries existing or planned high‑occupancy
vehicle lanes on the state highway system, and those same counties, as part
of a regional transportation investment plan, may, with voter approval,
impose a local surcharge of not more than ((13.64 percent on the state motor
vehicle excise tax paid under RCW 82.44.020(1))) three-tenths of one
percent of the value on vehicles registered to a person residing within the
county and not more than 13.64 percent on the state sales and use taxes
paid under the rate in RCW 82.08.020(2) on retail car rentals within the
county. No surcharge may be imposed on vehicles licensed under RCW 46.16.070
except vehicles with an unladen weight of six thousand pounds or less, RCW
46.16.079, 46.16.085, or 46.16.090.

((Counties imposing
a tax under this section shall contract, before the effective date of the
resolution or ordinance imposing a surcharge, administration and collection to
the state department of licensing, and department of revenue, as appropriate,
which shall deduct an amount, as provided by contract, for administration and
collection expenses incurred by the department.)) (2) All
administrative provisions in chapters 82.03, 82.32, and 82.44 RCW shall,
insofar as they are applicable to ((state)) motor vehicle excise taxes,
be applicable to surcharges imposed under this section. All administrative provisions
in chapters 82.03, 82.08, 82.12, and 82.32 RCW shall, insofar as they are
applicable to state sales and use taxes, be applicable to surcharges imposed
under this section.

(3) The local
surcharge applies only when initially applying for or renewing a vehicle
registration. This surcharge will be effective with the initial application
and upon the registration renewal date as provided by the department of
licensing. This surcharge is effective for counties under chapter 36.-- RCW
(sections 101 through 109 of this act) only for registration renewals.

(4) A county
imposing the local surcharge or initiating an exemption process shall enter
into a contract with the department of licensing for collection of the tax.
The contract must contain provisions that fully recover the costs to the
department of licensing for collection and administration of the surcharge.

(5) A county
imposing the surcharge shall delay the effective date of the surcharge imposed
by this section at least six months from the date of the final certification of
the referendum to allow the department of licensing time to implement the
administration and collection of or exemption from the surcharge.

(6) If the tax
authorized in RCW 81.100.030 is also imposed ((by the county)), the total
proceeds from tax sources imposed under this section and RCW 81.100.030 each
year shall not exceed the maximum amount ((which)) that could be
collected under this section.

Sec. 215. RCW 82.80.010 and 1998 c
176 s 86 are each amended to read as follows:

LOCAL OPTION FUEL TAX.
(1) For purposes of this section:

(a)
"Distributor" means every person who imports, refines, manufactures,
produces, or compounds motor vehicle fuel and special fuel as defined in RCW
82.36.010 and 82.38.020, respectively, and sells or distributes the fuel into a
county;

(b)
"Person" has the same meaning as in RCW 82.04.030.

(2) Subject to
the conditions of this section, any county may levy, by approval of its
legislative body and a majority of the registered voters of the county voting
on the proposition at a general or special election, additional excise taxes
equal to ten percent of the statewide motor vehicle fuel tax rate under RCW
82.36.025 on each gallon of motor vehicle fuel as defined in RCW 82.36.010 and
on each gallon of special fuel as defined in RCW 82.38.020 sold within the
boundaries of the county. Vehicles paying an annual license fee under RCW
82.38.075 are exempt from the county fuel excise tax. An election held under
this section must be held not more than twelve months before the date on which
the proposed tax is to be levied. The ballot setting forth the proposition
shall state the tax rate that is proposed. The county's authority to levy
additional excise taxes under this section includes the incorporated and
unincorporated areas of the county. The additional excise taxes are subject to
the same exceptions and rights of refund as applicable to other motor vehicle
fuel and special fuel excise taxes levied under chapters 82.36 and 82.38 RCW.
The proposed tax shall not be levied less than one month from the date the
election results are certified by the county election officer. The
commencement date for the levy of any tax under this section shall be the first
day of January, April, July, or October.

(((2) Every person
subject to the tax shall pay, in addition to any other taxes provided by law,
an additional excise tax to the director of licensing at the rate levied by a
county exercising its authority under this section.))

(3) The local option
motor vehicle fuel tax on each gallon of motor vehicle fuel and on each gallon
of special fuel is imposed upon the distributor of the fuel.

(4) The incidence of
the tax occurs upon the first distribution of the fuel within the exterior
boundaries of a county to a retail outlet, bulk fuel user, or ultimate user of
the fuel.

(5) All
administrative provisions in chapters 82.01, 82.03, and 82.32 RCW, as they now
exist or may hereafter be amended, insofar as they are applicable, also apply
to local option fuel taxes imposed under this section.

(6) Before the
effective date of the imposition of the fuel taxes under this section, a county
shall contract with the department of revenue for the administration and
collection of the taxes. The contract must provide that a percentage amount,
not to exceed two percent of the taxes imposed under this section, will be
deposited into the local tax administration account created in the custody of
the state treasurer. The department of revenue may spend money from this
account, upon appropriation, for the administration of the local taxes imposed
under this section.

(7) A county imposing
the tax authorized under this section shall provide funds to distributors to
offset their local fuel tax administration costs. The county shall dedicate a
percentage amount of the tax collected under this section for that purpose.
The percentage amount must be equal to the amount provided for the
administrative expenses of the department of revenue under subsection (6) of
this section.

(8) The state
treasurer shall distribute monthly to the levying county and cities contained
therein the proceeds of the additional excise taxes collected under this
section, or to the county levying the tax as part of a regional
transportation investment plan, after the deductions for payments and
expenditures as provided in RCW 46.68.090(1) ((and (2))) and under the conditions
and limitations provided in RCW 82.80.080.

(((4))) (9)
The proceeds of the additional excise taxes levied under this section shall be
used strictly for transportation purposes in accordance with RCW 82.80.070. The
proceeds of the additional taxes levied by a county, as a part of a regional
transportation investment plan, must be used as provided in chapter 36.-- RCW
(sections 101 through 109 of this act).

(((5) The department
of licensing shall administer and collect the county fuel taxes. The
department shall deduct a percentage amount, as provided by contract, for
administrative, collection, refund, and audit expenses incurred. The remaining
proceeds shall be remitted to the custody of the state treasurer for monthly
distribution under RCW 82.80.080.))

(10) A county
levying the tax under this section to implement a regional transportation
investment plan may not levy the county local option fuel tax under this
section.

Sec. 216. RCW 82.80.020 and 2001 c
64 s 15 are each amended to read as follows:

VEHICLE LICENSE FEE‑-EXEMPTIONS‑-LIMITATIONS.
(1) The legislative authority of a county, or subject to subsection (7) of this
section, a qualifying city or town located in a county that has not imposed a
fifteen-dollar fee under this section, may fix and impose an additional fee,
not to exceed fifteen dollars per vehicle, for each vehicle that is subject to
license fees under RCW 46.16.0621 and for each vehicle that is subject to RCW 46.16.070
with an unladen weight of six thousand pounds or less, and that is determined
by the department of licensing to be registered within the boundaries of the
county.

(2) The department of
licensing shall administer and collect the fee. The department shall deduct a
percentage amount, as provided by contract, not to exceed two percent of the
taxes collected, for administration and collection expenses incurred by it.
The remaining proceeds shall be remitted to the custody of the state treasurer
for monthly distribution under RCW 82.80.080.

(3) The proceeds of
this fee shall be used strictly for transportation purposes in accordance with
RCW 82.80.070.

(4) A county or
qualifying city or town imposing this fee or initiating an exemption process
shall delay the effective date at least six months from the date the ordinance
is enacted to allow the department of licensing to implement administration and
collection of or exemption from the fee.

(5) The legislative
authority of a county or qualifying city or town may develop and initiate an
exemption process of the fifteen dollar fee for the registered owners of
vehicles residing within the boundaries of the county or qualifying city or
town: (a) Who are sixty-one years old or older at the time payment of the fee
is due and whose household income for the previous calendar year is less than
an amount prescribed by the county or qualifying city or town legislative
authority; or (b) who have a physical disability.

(6) The legislative
authority of a county or qualifying city or town shall develop and initiate an
exemption process of the fifteen-dollar fee for vehicles registered within the
boundaries of the county that are licensed under RCW 46.16.374.

(7) For purposes of
this section, a "qualifying city or town" means a city or town ((residing
within a county having a population of greater than seventy-five thousand in
which is located all or part of a national monument)) whose legislative
authority has imposed by ordinance a vehicle license fee. A qualifying
city or town may impose the fee authorized in subsection (1) of this section
subject to the following conditions and limitations:

(a) The city or town
may impose the fee only if authorized to do so by a majority of voters voting
at a general or special election on a proposition for that purpose. At a
minimum, the ballot measure shall contain: (i) A description of the
transportation project proposed for funding, properly identified by mileposts
or other designations that specify the project parameters; (ii) the proposed
number of months or years necessary to fund the city or town's share of the
project cost; and (iii) the amount of fee to be imposed for the project.

(b) The city or town
may not impose a fee that, if combined with the county fee, exceeds fifteen
dollars. If a county imposes or increases a fee under this section that, if
combined with the fee imposed by a city or town, exceeds fifteen dollars, the
city or town fee shall be reduced or eliminated as needed so that in no city or
town does the combined fee exceed fifteen dollars. All revenues from
county-imposed fees shall be distributed as called for in RCW 82.80.080.

(c) Any fee imposed by
a city or town under this section shall expire at the end of the term of months
or years provided in the ballot measure, or when the city or town's bonded
indebtedness on the project is retired, whichever is sooner.

(d) A county may
impose the fee in all areas of the county other than within the incorporated
boundary of a city or town that has already imposed the fee.

(8) The fee imposed
under subsection (7) of this section shall apply only to renewals and shall not
apply to ownership transfer transactions.

Sec. 217. RCW 82.80.030 and 1990 c
42 s 208 are each amended to read as follows:

PARKING TAX. (1)
Subject to the conditions of this section, the legislative authority of a
county or city may fix and impose a parking tax on all persons engaged in a
commercial parking business within its respective jurisdiction. ((The
jurisdiction of a county, for purposes of this section, includes only the
unincorporated area of the county)) If a county is imposing the tax to
implement a regional transportation investment plan under chapter 36.-- RCW
(sections 101 through 109 of this act) the county may impose the tax throughout
its jurisdiction excluding cities that have levied a tax under this section
before the effective date of the county levy. Otherwise, the county may impose
the tax only in the unincorporated area of the county. The jurisdiction of
a city includes only the area within its ((incorporated)) boundaries.

(2) In lieu of the tax
in subsection (1) of this section, a city or a county ((in its
unincorporated area)) within the jurisdiction authorized under
subsection (1) of this section, may fix and impose a tax for the act or
privilege of parking a motor vehicle in a facility operated by a commercial
parking business.

The city or county may
provide that:

(a) The tax is paid by
the operator or owner of the motor vehicle;

(b) The tax applies to
all parking for which a fee is paid, whether paid or leased, including parking
supplied with a lease of nonresidential space;

(c) The tax is
collected by the operator of the facility and remitted to the city or county;

(d) The tax is a fee
per vehicle or is measured by the parking charge;

(e) The tax rate varies
with zoning or location of the facility, the duration of the parking, the time
of entry or exit, the type or use of the vehicle, or other reasonable factors;
and

(f) Tax exempt
carpools, vehicles with handicapped decals, or government vehicles are exempt
from the tax.

(3) "Commercial
parking business" as used in this section, means the ownership, lease,
operation, or management of a commercial parking lot in which fees are
charged. "Commercial parking lot" means a covered or uncovered area
with stalls for the purpose of parking motor vehicles.

(4) The rate of the tax
under subsection (1) of this section may be based either upon gross proceeds or
the number of vehicle stalls available for commercial parking use. The rates
charged must be uniform for the same class or type of commercial parking
business.

(5) The county or city
levying the tax provided for in subsection (1) or (2) of this section may
provide for its payment on a monthly, quarterly, or annual basis. Each local
government may develop by ordinance or resolution rules for administering the
tax, including provisions for reporting by commercial parking businesses,
collection, and enforcement.

(6) The proceeds of the
commercial parking tax fixed and imposed by a city or county, not part of a
regional transportation investment plan, under subsection (1) or (2) of
this section shall be used strictly for transportation purposes in accordance
with RCW 82.80.070. The proceeds of the parking tax imposed by a county, as
part of a regional transportation investment plan, shall be used as provided in
chapter 36.-- RCW (sections 101 through 109 of this act).

Sec. 218. RCW 82.80.070 and 1991 c
141 s 4 are each amended to read as follows:

REQUIRES THAT LOCAL
OPTION TAXES IMPOSED BY DISTRICT BE USED FOR DISTRICT PROJECTS. (1) The
proceeds collected pursuant to the exercise of the local option authority of
RCW 82.80.010, 82.80.020, 82.80.030, and 82.80.050 and sections 206, 211,
and 212 of this act, (hereafter called "local option transportation
revenues") shall be used for transportation purposes only, including but
not limited to the following: The operation and preservation of roads,
streets, and other transportation improvements; new construction,
reconstruction, and expansion of city streets, county roads, and state highways
and other transportation improvements; development and implementation of public
transportation and high-capacity transit improvements and programs; and
planning, design, and acquisition of right of way and sites for such
transportation purposes. The proceeds collected from excise taxes on the sale,
distribution, or use of motor vehicle fuel and special fuel under RCW 82.80.010
shall be used exclusively for "highway purposes" as that term is
construed in Article II, section 40 of the state Constitution.

(2) The local option
transportation revenues shall be expended for transportation uses consistent
with the adopted transportation and land use plans of the jurisdiction
expending the funds and consistent with any applicable and adopted regional
transportation plan for metropolitan planning areas.

(3) Each local government
with a population greater than eight thousand that levies or expends local
option transportation funds, is also required to develop and adopt a specific
transportation program that contains the following elements:

(a) The program shall
identify the geographic boundaries of the entire area or areas within which
local option transportation revenues will be levied and expended.

(b) The program shall
be based on an adopted transportation plan for the geographic areas covered and
shall identify the proposed operation and construction of transportation
improvements and services in the designated plan area intended to be funded in
whole or in part by local option transportation revenues and shall identify the
annual costs applicable to the program.

(c) The program shall
indicate how the local transportation plan is coordinated with applicable
transportation plans for the region and for adjacent jurisdictions.

(d) The program shall
include at least a six-year funding plan, updated annually, identifying the specific
public and private sources and amounts of revenue necessary to fund the
program. The program shall include a proposed schedule for construction of
projects and expenditure of revenues. The funding plan shall consider the
additional local tax revenue estimated to be generated by new development
within the plan area if all or a portion of the additional revenue is proposed
to be earmarked as future appropriations for transportation improvements in the
program.

(4) Local governments
with a population greater than eight thousand exercising the authority for
local option transportation funds shall periodically review and update their
transportation program to ensure that it is consistent with applicable local
and regional transportation and land use plans and within the means of
estimated public and private revenue available.

(5) In the case of
expenditure for new or expanded transportation facilities, improvements, and
services, priorities in the use of local option transportation revenues shall
be identified in the transportation program and expenditures shall be made
based upon the following criteria, which are stated in descending order of
weight to be attributed:

(a) First, the project
serves a multijurisdictional function;

(b) Second, it is
necessitated by existing or reasonably foreseeable congestion;

(c) Third, it has the
greatest person-carrying capacity;

(d) Fourth, it is
partially funded by other government funds, such as from the state
transportation improvement board, or by private sector contributions, such as
those from the local transportation act, chapter 39.92 RCW; and

(e) Fifth, it meets
such other criteria as the local government determines is appropriate.

(6) It is the intent of
the legislature that as a condition of levying, receiving, and expending local
option transportation revenues, no local government agency use the revenues to
replace, divert, or loan any revenues currently being used for transportation
purposes to nontransportation purposes. The association of Washington cities
and the Washington state association of counties, in consultation with the
legislative transportation committee, shall study the issue of nondiversion and
make recommendations to the legislative transportation committee for language
implementing the intent of this section by December 1, 1990.

(7) Local governments
are encouraged to enter into interlocal agreements to jointly develop and adopt
with other local governments the transportation programs required by this
section for the purpose of accomplishing regional transportation planning and
development.

(8) Local governments
may use all or a part of the local option transportation revenues for the
amortization of local government general obligation and revenue bonds issued
for transportation purposes consistent with the requirements of this section.

(9) Proceeds
collected under the exercise of local option authority under this chapter by a
county, as part of a regional transportation investment plan, must be used in
accordance with chapter 36.-- RCW (sections 101 through 109 of this act).

Sec. 219. RCW 82.80.080 and 1998 c
281 s 2 are each amended to read as follows:

LOCAL OPTION TAX
REVENUE DISTRIBUTION. (1) The state treasurer shall distribute revenues, less
authorized deductions, generated by the local option taxes authorized in RCW
82.80.010 and 82.80.020, levied by counties to the levying counties, and cities
contained in those counties, based on the relative per capita population.
County population for purposes of this section is equal to one and one-half of
the unincorporated population of the county. In calculating the distributions,
the state treasurer shall use the population estimates prepared by the state
office of financial management and shall further calculate the distribution
based on information supplied by the departments of licensing and revenue, as
appropriate.

(2) The state treasurer
shall distribute revenues, less authorized deductions, generated by the local
option taxes authorized in RCW 82.80.010 and 82.80.020 levied by qualifying
cities and towns to the levying cities and towns.

(3) The state
treasurer shall distribute revenues to a county, as part of a regional
transportation investment plan, less authorized deductions, generated by the
local option taxes under RCW 82.80.010 or fees under section 211 of this act.

Sec. 220. RCW 47.56.030 and 2001 c
59 s 1 are each amended to read as follows:

EXCEPTION FOR COUNTY
TOLL FACILITIES. (1) Except as provided in RCW 47.56.075, the
department of transportation shall have full charge of the construction of all
toll bridges and other toll facilities including the Washington state ferries,
and the operation and maintenance thereof. The transportation commission shall
determine and establish the tolls and charges thereon, and shall perform all
duties and exercise all powers relating to the financing, refinancing, and
fiscal management of all toll bridges and other toll facilities including the
Washington state ferries, and bonded indebtedness in the manner provided by
law. The department shall have full charge of design of all toll facilities.
Except as provided in this section, the department shall proceed with the
construction of such toll bridges and other facilities and the approaches
thereto by contract in the manner of state highway construction immediately
upon there being made available funds for such work and shall prosecute such
work to completion as rapidly as practicable. The department is authorized to
negotiate contracts for any amount without bid under (a) and (b) of this
subsection:

(a) Emergency
contracts, in order to make repairs to ferries or ferry terminal facilities or
removal of such facilities whenever continued use of ferries or ferry terminal
facilities constitutes a real or immediate danger to the traveling public or
precludes prudent use of such ferries or facilities; and

(b) Single source
contracts for vessel dry dockings, when there is clearly and legitimately only
one available bidder to conduct dry dock-related work for a specific class or
classes of vessels. The contracts may be entered into for a single vessel dry
docking or for multiple vessel dry dockings for a period not to exceed two
years.

(2) The department
shall proceed with the procurement of materials, supplies, services, and
equipment needed for the support, maintenance, and use of a ferry, ferry
terminal, or other facility operated by Washington state ferries, in accordance
with chapter 43.19 RCW except as follows:

(a) Except as provided
in (d) of this subsection, when the secretary of the department of transportation
determines in writing that the use of invitation for bid is either not
practicable or not advantageous to the state and it may be necessary to make
competitive evaluations, including technical or performance evaluations among
acceptable proposals to complete the contract award, a contract may be entered
into by use of a competitive sealed proposals method, and a formal request for
proposals solicitation. Such formal request for proposals solicitation shall
include a functional description of the needs and requirements of the state and
the significant factors.

(b) When purchases are
made through a formal request for proposals solicitation the contract shall be
awarded to the responsible proposer whose competitive sealed proposal is
determined in writing to be the most advantageous to the state taking into
consideration price and other evaluation factors set forth in the request for
proposals. No significant factors may be used in evaluating a proposal that
are not specified in the request for proposals. Factors that may be considered
in evaluating proposals include but are not limited to: Price;
maintainability; reliability; commonality; performance levels; life cycle cost
if applicable under this section; cost of transportation or delivery; delivery
schedule offered; installation cost; cost of spare parts; availability of parts
and service offered; and the following:

(i) The ability,
capacity, and skill of the proposer to perform the contract or provide the
service required;

(ii) The character,
integrity, reputation, judgment, experience, and efficiency of the proposer;

(iii) Whether the
proposer can perform the contract within the time specified;

(iv) The quality of
performance of previous contracts or services;

(v) The previous and
existing compliance by the proposer with laws relating to the contract or
services;

(vi) Objective,
measurable criteria defined in the request for proposal. These criteria may
include but are not limited to items such as discounts, delivery costs,
maintenance services costs, installation costs, and transportation costs; and

(vii) Such other
information as may be secured having a bearing on the decision to award the
contract.

(c) When purchases are
made through a request for proposal process, proposals received shall be
evaluated based on the evaluation factors set forth in the request for
proposal. When issuing a request for proposal for the procurement of
propulsion equipment or systems that include an engine, the request for proposal
must specify the use of a life cycle cost analysis that includes an evaluation
of fuel efficiency. When a life cycle cost analysis is used, the life cycle
cost of a proposal shall be given at least the same relative importance as the
initial price element specified in the request of proposal documents. The
department may reject any and all proposals received. If the proposals are not
rejected, the award shall be made to the proposer whose proposal is most
advantageous to the department, considering price and the other evaluation
factors set forth in the request for proposal.

(d) If the department
is procuring large equipment or systems (e.g., electrical, propulsion) needed
for the support, maintenance, and use of a ferry operated by Washington state ferries,
the department shall proceed with a formal request for proposal solicitation
under this subsection (2) without a determination of necessity by the
secretary.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
221. DESIGNATION OF STATE
ROUTE NUMBER 509. The legislature designates that portion of state route
number 509 that runs or will run from state route number 518 in the north to
the intersection with interstate 5 in the south as a state highway of statewide
significance.

Sec. 222. RCW 47.56.075 and 1984 c
7 s 252 are each amended to read as follows:

COUNTY DESIGNATION OF
TOLL FACILITY. (1) The department shall approve for construction only
such toll roads as the legislature specifically authorizes or such toll
facilities as are specifically sponsored by a city, town, or county.

(2) A county may
designate a state highway within its boundaries as a toll bridge or a toll road
subject to section 212 of this act. In that event, the county shall enter into
an interlocal agreement with the state providing for the state to administer
the toll facility under this chapter, including the issuance, sale, and
redemption of bonds under this chapter.

III. CITY TRANSPORTATION
AUTHORITIES

NEW SECTION. Sec.
301. The definitions in this
section apply throughout this chapter unless the context clearly requires
otherwise.

(1)
"Authority" means a city transportation authority created under this
chapter.

(2) "Authority
area" means the territory within a city or cities, and contiguous
unincorporated territory, or such portions thereof, as designated in the
ordinance creating the authority.

(3) "Bonds"
means bonds, notes, or other evidences of indebtedness.

(4) "Public
transportation function" means the transportation of passengers and their
incidental baggage, as authorized in this chapter, together with the necessary
passenger stations, terminals, parking facilities, related facilities or other properties,
and facilities necessary and appropriate for passenger and vehicular access to
and from people-moving systems.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
302. (1) Every city with a
population greater than three hundred thousand may create a city transportation
authority to perform a public transportation function. The authority must
embrace all the territory in the authority area. A city transportation
authority will be a municipal corporation, an independent taxing
"authority" within the meaning of Article VII, section 1 of the state
Constitution, and a "taxing district" within the meaning of Article
VII, section 2 of the state Constitution.

(2) Any city
transportation authority established under this chapter must be approved by a
majority vote of the electors residing within the proposed authority area
voting at a regular or special election. Additional territory may be added to
an authority area with the approval of the legislative authority of each city,
or county in the case of an unincorporated area, within which the territory
exists, and with the approval of the electors within the area proposed to be
added to the authority area.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
303. (1) A city that
undertakes to create an authority shall propose the authority by ordinance of
the city legislative body. The ordinance must:

(a) Propose the
authority area and the size and method of selection of the governing body of
the authority, which governing body may be appointed or elected, provided that
officers or employees of any single city may not compose a majority of the
members of the authority's governing body;

(b) Propose whether all
or a specified portion of the public transportation function will be exercised
by the authority;

(c) Propose an initial
array of taxes to be voted upon by the electors within the proposed authority
area; and

(d) Provide for an
interim governing body of the authority that shall govern the authority upon
voter approval of formation of the authority, until a permanent governing body
is selected, but in no event longer than fourteen months.

(2) An authority may
also be proposed to be created by a petition setting forth the matters
described in subsection (1) of this section, and signed by one percent of the
qualified electors of the proposed authority area.

(3) If an authority is
proposed to be created with an authority area that includes more than one city,
or the unincorporated area of a county, an ordinance must be passed by the
legislative authority of all cities and counties within the proposed authority
area, or in the alternative, a petition must be signed by one percent of the
qualified electors of the proposed authority area within each city or
unincorporated area of a county.

(4) Upon approval of
its formation by the qualified electors, the governing body of an authority, or
interim governing body, as applicable, shall adopt bylaws determining, among
other things, the authority's officers and the method of their selection, and
other matters the governing body deems appropriate.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
304. Every authority has the
following powers:

(1) To acquire by
purchase, condemnation, gift, or grant and to lease, construct, add to,
improve, replace, repair, maintain, operate, and regulate the use of certain
public transportation facilities, including monorails, trams, and trolleys, and
including passenger terminal and parking facilities and properties, and other
facilities and properties as may be necessary for passenger and vehicular
access to and from public transportation facilities, together with all lands,
rights of way, and property within or outside the authority area, and together
with equipment and accessories necessary or appropriate for these facilities;

(2) To fix rates, tolls,
fares, and charges for the use of facilities and to establish various routes
and classes of service. Rates, tolls, fares, or charges may be adjusted or
eliminated for any distinguishable class of users including, but not limited
to, senior citizens, handicapped persons, and students;

(3) To contract with
the United States or any of its agencies, any state or any of its agencies, any
metropolitan municipal corporation, any other county, city, other political
subdivision or governmental instrumentality, or governmental agency, or any
private person, firm, or corporation for the purpose of receiving gifts or
grants or securing loans or advances for preliminary planning and feasibility
studies, or for the design, construction, operation, or maintenance of public
transportation facilities, as long as contracts for the construction of
facilities with an estimated cost greater than two hundred thousand dollars are
awarded after a competitive bid process consistent with chapter 39.04 RCW or
are awarded consistent with an alternative public works contracting procedure
consistent with chapter 39.10 RCW. Contracts for construction with an
estimated cost of two hundred thousand dollars or less may be awarded under RCW
39.04.155;

(4) To contract with
the United States or any of its agencies, any state or any of its agencies, any
metropolitan municipal corporation, any other county, city, other political
subdivision or governmental instrumentality, any governmental agency, or any
private person, firm, or corporation for the use by either contracting party of
all or any part of the facilities, structures, lands, interests in lands, air
rights over lands, and rights of way of all kinds which are owned, leased, or
held by the other party and for the purpose of planning, designing,
constructing, operating any public transportation facility, or performing any
service related to transportation which the authority is authorized to operate
or perform, on terms as may be agreed upon by the contracting parties;

(5) To acquire any
existing public transportation facility by conveyance, sale, or lease. In any
acquisition from a county, city, or other political subdivision of the state,
the authority shall receive credit from the county or city or other political
subdivision for any federal assistance and state matching assistance used by
the county or city or other political subdivision in acquiring any portion of
the public transportation facility. Upon acquisition, the authority shall
assume and observe all existing labor contracts relating to the public
transportation facility and, to the extent necessary for operation of the
public transportation facility, all of the employees of the public
transportation facility whose duties are necessary to efficiently operate the
public transportation facility shall be appointed to comparable positions to
those which they held at the time of the transfer, and no employee or retired
or pensioned employee of the public transportation facility shall be placed in
any worse position with respect to pension seniority, wages, sick leave,
vacation, or other benefits than he or she enjoyed as an employee of the public
transportation facility prior to the acquisition. Furthermore, the authority
shall engage in collective bargaining with the duly appointed representatives
of any employee labor organization having existing contracts with the acquired
facility and may enter into labor contracts with the employee labor
organization;

(6) To contract for,
participate in, and support research, demonstration, testing, and development
of public transportation facilities, equipment, and use incentives, and have
all powers necessary to comply with any criteria, standards, and regulations
that may be adopted under state and federal law, and to take all actions necessary
to meet the requirements of those laws. The authority has, in addition to
these powers, the authority to prepare, adopt, and carry out a comprehensive
transit plan and to make other plans and studies and to perform programs as the
authority deems necessary to implement and comply with those laws;

(7) To establish local
improvement districts within the authority area to finance public
transportation facilities, to levy special assessments on property specially
benefited by those facilities, and to issue local improvement bonds to be
repaid by the collection of local improvement assessments. The method of
establishment, levying, collection, enforcement, and all other matters relating
to the local improvement districts, assessments, collection, and bonds must be
as provided in the statutes governing local improvement districts of cities and
towns. The duties devolving upon the city treasurer in those statutes are
imposed on the treasurer of the authority;

(8) To exercise all
other powers necessary and appropriate to carry out its responsibilities,
including without limitation the power to own, construct, purchase, lease, add
to, and maintain any real and personal property or property rights necessary
for the conduct of the affairs of the authority, to enter into contracts, and
to employ the persons as the authority deems appropriate. An authority may
also sell, lease, convey, or otherwise dispose of any authority real or
personal property no longer necessary for the conduct of the affairs of the authority.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
305. Each authority shall
establish the funds and accounts it deems necessary and appropriate. The
authority may designate a treasurer or may contract with any city with
territory within the authority area for treasury and other financial
functions. The city will be reimbursed for the expenses of treasury services.
However, no city whose treasurer serves as treasurer of an authority is liable
for the obligations of the authority.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
306. The authority shall adopt
a public transportation plan for public transportation facilities to be
provided by the authority. The plan, and any amendments, must be approved by
the legislative authority of each city and county, in the case of
unincorporated territory, comprising more than ten percent of the qualified
electors in the authority area. Before adoption of the plan, the authority
shall provide a minimum of sixty days during which sufficient public hearings must
be held to provide interested persons an opportunity to participate in
development of the plan.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
307. Every authority has the
power to:

(1) Levy excess levies
upon the property included within the authority area, in the manner prescribed
by Article VII, section 2 of the state Constitution and by RCW 84.52.052 for
operating funds, capital outlay funds, and cumulative reserve funds;

(2) Issue general
obligation bonds, not to exceed an amount, together with any outstanding
nonvoter-approved general obligation indebtedness equal to one and one-half
percent of the value of the taxable property within the authority area, as the
term "value of the taxable property" is defined in RCW 39.36.015. An
authority may additionally issue general obligation bonds, together with
outstanding voter‑approved and nonvoter-approved general obligation
indebtedness, equal to two and one-half percent of the value of the taxable
property within the authority area, as the term "value of the taxable
property" is defined in RCW 39.36.015, when the bonds are approved by
three-fifths of the qualified electors of the authority at a general or special
election called for that purpose and may provide for the retirement thereof by
levies in excess of dollar rate limitations in accordance with the provisions
of RCW 84.52.056. These elections must be held as provided in RCW 39.36.050;

(3) Issue revenue bonds
payable from any revenues other than taxes levied by the authority, and to
pledge those revenues for the repayment of the bonds. Proceeds of revenue
bonds may be expended for the costs of public transportation facilities, for
financing costs, and for capitalized interest during construction plus six
months thereafter. The bonds and warrants must be issued and sold in
accordance with chapter 39.46 RCW.

Unless authorized by
the legislative authority of a city or county or by the legislature, bonds
issued by an authority are not obligations of any city, county, or the state of
Washington or any political subdivision thereof other than the authority, and
the bonds must state that fact.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
308. (1) Every authority has
the power to levy and collect a special excise tax not exceeding two and
one-half percent on the value of every motor vehicle owned by a resident of the
authority area for the privilege of using a motor vehicle. Before use of any
excise tax money collected under this section for acquisition of right of way
or construction of a public transportation facility on a separate right of way,
the authority shall adopt rules affording the public an opportunity for
corridor public hearings and design public hearings, which must provide in
detail the procedures necessary for public participation in the following
instances: (a) Before adoption of location and design plans having a
substantial social, economic, or environmental effect upon the locality upon
which they are to be constructed; or (b) on the public transportation
facilities operating on a separate right of way whenever a substantial change
is proposed relating to location or design in the adopted plan. In adopting
rules the authority shall adhere to the provisions of the Administrative
Procedure Act.

(2) A "corridor
public hearing" is a public hearing that: (a) Is held before the
authority is committed to a specific route proposal for the public
transportation facility, and before a route location is established; (b) is
held to afford an opportunity for participation by those interested in the
determination of the need for, and the location of, the public transportation
facility; and (c) provides a public forum that affords a full opportunity for
presenting views on the public transportation facility route location, and the
social, economic, and environmental effects on that location and alternate
locations. However, the hearing is not necessary before adoption of a
transportation plan as provided in section 306 of this act or a vote of the
qualified electors under subsection (5) of this section.

(3) A "design
public hearing" is a public hearing that: (a) Is held after the location
is established but before the design is adopted; (b) is held to afford an
opportunity for participation by those interested in the determination of major
design features of the public transportation facility; and (c) provides a
public forum to afford a full opportunity for presenting views on the public
transportation system design, and the social, economic, and environmental
effects of that design and alternate designs.

(4) An authority
imposing a tax under subsection (1) of this section may also impose a sales and
use tax, in addition to any tax authorized by RCW 82.14.030, upon retail car
rentals within the city that are taxable by the state under chapters 82.08 and
82.12 RCW. The rate of tax may not exceed 1.944 percent of the base of the
tax. The base of the tax is the selling price in the case of a sales tax or
the rental value of the vehicle used in the case of a use tax. The tax imposed
under this section must be deducted from the amount of any tax otherwise due
under RCW 82.08.020(2). The revenue collected under this subsection must be
distributed in the same manner as sales and use taxes under chapter 82.14 RCW.

(5) Before an authority
may impose any of the taxes authorized under this section, the authorization
for imposition of the taxes must be approved by the qualified electors of the
authority area.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
309. (1) Every authority may
fix and impose a fee, not to exceed one hundred dollars per vehicle, for each
vehicle that is subject to license tab fees under RCW 46.16.0621 and for each
vehicle that is subject to RCW 46.16.070 with an unladen weight of six thousand
pounds or less, and that is determined by the department of licensing to be
registered within the boundaries of the authority area. The department of
licensing shall provide an exemption from the fee for any vehicle the owner of
which demonstrates is not operated within the authority area.

(2) The department of
licensing shall administer and collect the fee. The department shall deduct a
percentage amount, as provided by contract, not to exceed two percent of the
taxes collected, for administration and collection expenses incurred by it.
The remaining proceeds must be remitted to the custody of the state treasurer
for monthly distribution to the authority.

(3) The authority
imposing this fee shall delay the effective date at least six months from the
date the fee is approved by the qualified voters of the authority area to allow
the department of licensing to implement administration and collection of the
fee.

(4) Before an authority
may impose any of the fees authorized under this section, the authorization for
imposition of the fees must be approved by a majority of the qualified electors
of the authority area voting.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
310. (1) Every authority may
impose annual regular property tax levies in an amount equal to one dollar and
fifty cents or less per thousand dollars of assessed value of property in the
authority area when specifically authorized to do so by a majority of the
voters voting on a proposition submitted at a special election or at the regular
election of the authority. A proposition authorizing the tax levies may not be
submitted by an authority more than twice in any twelve-month period. Ballot
propositions must conform with RCW 29.30.111. The number of years during which
the regular levy will be imposed may be limited as specified in the ballot
proposition or may be unlimited in duration. If an authority is levying
property taxes that in combination with property taxes levied by other taxing
districts subject to the one percent limitation provided for in Article VII,
section 2 of the state Constitution result in taxes in excess of the limitation
provided for in RCW 84.52.043, the authority's property tax levy must be
reduced or eliminated consistent with RCW 84.52.010.

(2) The limitation in
RCW 84.55.010 does not apply to the first levy imposed under this section after
the approval of the levies by the voters under subsection (1) of this section.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
311. All taxes and fees levied
and collected by an authority must be levied and used solely for the purpose of
paying all or any part of the cost of acquiring, designing, constructing,
equipping, or operating the facilities of an authority or contracting for the
services thereof, or to pay or secure the payment of all or part of the
principal of or interest on any general obligation bonds or revenue bonds
issued for authority purposes. Until expended, money accumulated in the funds
and accounts of an authority may be invested in the manner authorized by the
governing body of the authority, consistent with state law.

If any of the revenue
from any tax or fee authorized to be levied by an authority has been pledged by
the authority to secure the payment of any bonds as authorized in this chapter,
then as long as that pledge is in effect the legislature shall not withdraw
from the authority the authorization to levy and collect the tax or fee.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
312. The special excise tax
imposed under section 309(1) of this act will be collected at the same time and
in the same manner as license tab fees under RCW 46.16.0621 and section 310 of
this act. Every year on January 1st, April 1st, July 1st, and October 1st the
department of licensing shall remit special excise taxes collected on behalf of
an authority, back to the authority, at no cost to the authority.

Sec. 313. RCW 84.52.010 and 1995
2nd sp.s. c 13 s 4 are each amended to read as follows:

Except as is permitted
under RCW 84.55.050, all taxes shall be levied or voted in specific amounts.

The rate percent of all
taxes for state and county purposes, and purposes of taxing districts
coextensive with the county, shall be determined, calculated and fixed by the
county assessors of the respective counties, within the limitations provided by
law, upon the assessed valuation of the property of the county, as shown by the
completed tax rolls of the county, and the rate percent of all taxes levied for
purposes of taxing districts within any county shall be determined, calculated
and fixed by the county assessors of the respective counties, within the
limitations provided by law, upon the assessed valuation of the property of the
taxing districts respectively.

When a county assessor
finds that the aggregate rate of tax levy on any property, that is subject to
the limitations set forth in RCW 84.52.043 or 84.52.050, exceeds the
limitations provided in either of these sections, the assessor shall recompute
and establish a consolidated levy in the following manner:

(1) The full certified
rates of tax levy for state, county, county road district, and city or town
purposes shall be extended on the tax rolls in amounts not exceeding the limitations
established by law; however any state levy shall take precedence over all other
levies and shall not be reduced for any purpose other than that required by RCW
84.55.010. If, as a result of the levies imposed under RCW 84.52.069,
84.34.230, the portion of the levy by a metropolitan park district that was
protected under RCW 84.52.120, and 84.52.105, the combined rate of regular
property tax levies that are subject to the one percent limitation exceeds one
percent of the true and fair value of any property, then these levies shall be
reduced as follows: (a) The portion of the levy by a metropolitan park
district that is protected under RCW 84.52.120 shall be reduced until the
combined rate no longer exceeds one percent of the true and fair value of any
property or shall be eliminated; (b) if the combined rate of regular property
tax levies that are subject to the one percent limitation still exceeds one
percent of the true and fair value of any property, then the levies imposed
under RCW 84.34.230, 84.52.105, and any portion of the levy imposed under RCW
84.52.069 that is in excess of thirty cents per thousand dollars of assessed
value, shall be reduced on a pro rata basis until the combined rate no longer
exceeds one percent of the true and fair value of any property or shall be
eliminated; and (c) if the combined rate of regular property tax levies that
are subject to the one percent limitation still exceeds one percent of the true
and fair value of any property, then the thirty cents per thousand dollars of
assessed value of tax levy imposed under RCW 84.52.069 shall be reduced until
the combined rate no longer exceeds one percent of the true and fair value of
any property or eliminated.

(2) The certified rates
of tax levy subject to these limitations by all junior taxing districts
imposing taxes on such property shall be reduced or eliminated as follows to
bring the consolidated levy of taxes on such property within the provisions of
these limitations:

(a) First, the
certified property tax levy rates of those junior taxing districts authorized
under RCW 36.68.525, 36.69.145, section 310 of this act, and 67.38.130
shall be reduced on a pro rata basis or eliminated;

(b) Second, if the
consolidated tax levy rate still exceeds these limitations, the certified
property tax levy rates of flood control zone districts shall be reduced on a
pro rata basis or eliminated;

(c) Third, if the
consolidated tax levy rate still exceeds these limitations, the certified
property tax levy rates of all other junior taxing districts, other than fire
protection districts, library districts, the first fifty cent per thousand
dollars of assessed valuation levies for metropolitan park districts, and the
first fifty cent per thousand dollars of assessed valuation levies for public
hospital districts, shall be reduced on a pro rata basis or eliminated;

(d) Fourth, if the
consolidated tax levy rate still exceeds these limitations, the certified
property tax levy rates authorized to fire protection districts under RCW
52.16.140 and 52.16.160 shall be reduced on a pro rata basis or eliminated; and

(e) Fifth, if the
consolidated tax levy rate still exceeds these limitations, the certified
property tax levy rates authorized for fire protection districts under RCW
52.16.130, library districts, metropolitan park districts under their first
fifty cent per thousand dollars of assessed valuation levy, and public hospital
districts under their first fifty cent per thousand dollars of assessed
valuation levy, shall be reduced on a pro rata basis or eliminated.

In determining whether
the aggregate rate of tax levy on any property, that is subject to the
limitations set forth in RCW 84.52.050, exceeds the limitations provided in
that section, the assessor shall use the hypothetical state levy, as
apportioned to the county under RCW 84.48.080, that was computed under RCW
84.48.080 without regard to the reduction under RCW 84.55.012.

Sec. 314. RCW 84.52.052 and 1996 c
230 s 1615 are each amended to read as follows:

The limitations imposed
by RCW 84.52.050 through 84.52.056, and RCW 84.52.043 shall not prevent the
levy of additional taxes by any taxing district except school districts in
which a larger levy is necessary in order to prevent the impairment of the obligation
of contracts. As used in this section, the term "taxing district"
means any county, metropolitan park district, park and recreation service area,
park and recreation district, water-sewer district, solid waste disposal
district, public facilities district, flood control zone district, county rail
district, service district, public hospital district, road district, rural
county library district, island library district, rural partial-county library
district, intercounty rural library district, fire protection district,
cemetery district, city, town, transportation benefit district, emergency
medical service district with a population density of less than one thousand
per square mile, ((or)) cultural arts, stadium, and convention district,
or city transportation authority.

Any such taxing
district may levy taxes at a rate in excess of the rate specified in RCW
84.52.050 through 84.52.056 and 84.52.043, or 84.55.010 through 84.55.050, when
authorized so to do by the voters of such taxing district in the manner set
forth in Article VII, section 2(a) of the Constitution of this state at a
special or general election to be held in the year in which the levy is made.

A special election may
be called and the time therefor fixed by the county legislative authority, or
council, board of commissioners, or other governing body of any such taxing
district, by giving notice thereof by publication in the manner provided by law
for giving notices of general elections, at which special election the
proposition authorizing such excess levy shall be submitted in such form as to
enable the voters favoring the proposition to vote "yes" and those
opposed thereto to vote "no."

NEW SECTION. Sec.
315. Sections 301 through 312
of this act constitute a new chapter in Title 36 RCW.

IV. MISCELLANEOUS PROVISIONS

NEW SECTION. Sec.
401. CAPTIONS. Captions used in this act
are not part of the law.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
402. STATEWIDE MOTOR FUEL
TAXES HELD HARMLESS. Existing statewide motor vehicle fuel and special fuel
taxes, at the distribution rates in RCW 46.68.090, are not intended to be
altered by this act.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
403. CODIFICATION. Sections
101 through 109 of this act constitute a new chapter in Title 36 RCW.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
404. SEVERABILITY. If any
provision of this act or its application to any person or circumstance is held
invalid, the remainder of the act or the application of the provision to other
persons or circumstances is not affected.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 405. CONTINGENT EFFECT. This
act is contingent upon a transportation revenue act
(. . . . . . Bill No. . . .) becoming law in
2002.

---
END ---