BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF
WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec.
1. (1) There is hereby
established a joint select committee on collective negotiations to study the
regulation of collective negotiations between health care providers and health
insurance carriers authorized under chapter 43.72 RCW. The committee shall be
composed of (a) two members of the house of representatives, one from each
political caucus to be appointed by the speaker; (b) two members of the senate,
one from each political caucus appointed by the president of the senate; and
(c) ex officio representatives of the office of the attorney general, the
office of the insurance commissioner, and the department of health
respectively. The chair of the committee shall be selected by legislative
members. In its deliberations, the committee shall consult with health care
provider professional associations, health carriers, and other state agencies
directly affected by the activities of collective negotiations.

(2) The committee shall
review (a) the appropriateness of collective negotiations on the terms and
conditions of contracts between health care providers and health carriers,
including reimbursement for provider services; (b) the benefits of voluntary
mediation and arbitration in case of impasse for furthering dispute resolution;
(c) the appropriateness of requiring health carriers and health care providers
to enter into collective negotiations in good faith; (d) the impact of
collective negotiations on the access of the public to health care providers,
on the costs of health care services, and on state and federal antitrust laws;
and (e) such other matters related to the purposes of this study.

(3) The committee may
use the staffing and support resources of the office of program research of the
house of representatives and the office of senate committee services within
available funds.

(4) The
committee shall report to the legislature by the first day of the regular
legislative session commencing in January 2003 on its findings and
recommendations, together with any legislative proposals implementing them.
The authority of the committee expires at such time.

---
END ---