BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF
WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec.
1. A new section is added
to chapter 46.01 RCW to read as follows:

(1) The department may
sell advertising or enter into agreements for the purpose of selling
advertising for inclusion in any of its publications, materials, or mailings.

(2) The department may
enter into agreements for the distribution of third-party publications or other
materials related to its mission of protecting and enhancing the public safety
and welfare in the areas it licenses and regulates that may contain commercial
advertisements or logos.

(3) The department
shall retain the right by agreement to approve advertising content to ensure
that the products or services are harmonious with the subject matter of the
publication and are not inconsistent with the department's mission to promote
public safety. The director shall deny any advertisement that includes content
that may be interpreted as contrary to the agency's mission or may carry
connotations offensive to good taste and decency or that would be misleading.
Any public information materials that include advertising of any kind must
provide a statement that inclusion of the materials does not constitute an
endorsement by the state or the agency of the products or services so
advertised.

(4) The department
shall deposit proceeds from advertising appearing in publications, materials,
and mailings related to the driver services program into the highway safety
fund. Expenditure from these proceeds must be appropriated.

(5) The department
shall deposit proceeds from advertising appearing in publications, materials,
and mailings related to the vehicle services program into the motor vehicle
account. Expenditure from these proceeds must be appropriated.

(6) The department
shall adopt rules to implement this section.

(7) The
department must report back to the transportation committees by no later than
January 31, 2003, and January 31, 2004, on the status of implementing the
provisions of this section. The status report must, at a minimum, address the
agency's advertisement plan which must include, but not be limited to,
information on the sources and the subjects of the advertising the department
is accepting, the amount of advertising revenue generated to date, and
information on any feedback provided by the general public regarding the use of
advertising.

--- END ---