BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF
WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1. RCW 46.81A.020 and 1998
c 245 s 91 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) The director shall
administer and enforce the law pertaining to the motorcycle skills education
program as set forth in this chapter.

(2) The director may
adopt and enforce reasonable rules that are consistent with this chapter.

(3) The director shall
revise the Washington motorcycle safety program to:

(a) Institute a
motorcycle skills education course for both novice and advanced motorcycle
riders that is a minimum of eight hours and no more than sixteen hours at a
cost of no more than fifty dollars for riders under the age of eighteen, and
no more than one hundred dollars for riders who are eighteen years of age or
older;

(b) Encourage the use
of loaned or used motorcycles for use in the motorcycle skills education course
if the instructor approves them;

(c) Require all
instructors to conduct at least three classes in a one-year period to maintain
their teaching eligibility;

(d) Encourage the use
of radio or intercom equipped helmets when, in the opinion of the instructor,
radio or intercom equipped helmets improve the quality of instruction.

(4) The
department shall obtain and compile information from applicants for a
motorcycle endorsement regarding whether they have completed a state approved
motorcycle skills education course.

--- END ---