BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF
WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec.
1. The legislature finds
that there has been an increase in studies showing a correlation between
exposure to violent video and computer games and various forms of hostile and
antisocial behavior. The entertainment software industry's ratings and content
descriptors of video and computer games reflect that some video and computer
games are suitable only for adults due to graphic depictions of sex and/or
violence. Furthermore, some video and computer games focus on violence
specifically against public law enforcement officers such as police and fire
fighters.

The legislature has a
compelling interest to curb hostile and antisocial behavior in Washington's
youth and to foster respect for public law enforcement officers.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
2. A new section is added
to chapter 9.91 RCW to read as follows:

(1) A person who sells,
rents, or permits to be sold or rented, any violent video or computer game to
any minor is guilty of a misdemeanor, punishable under chapter 9.92 RCW.

(2) "Minor"
means a person under eighteen years of age.

(3) "Person"
means any individual, partnership, corporation, or association engaged in the
business of selling or renting video or computer games.

(4) "Violent video
or computer game" means a video or computer game that:

(a) Contains realistic
or photographic-like depictions of aggressive conflict in which the player
kills, injures, or otherwise causes violence to a human form in the game who is
depicted, by dress or other recognizable symbols, as a public law enforcement
officer; and

(b) Has
been given a rating of "Mature," "For Adults Only," or an
equivalent rating by the video or computer game manufacturer or any
entertainment rating board commonly used by the video and computer game
industry.

---
END ---