BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF
WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1. RCW 49.12.270 and 1988 c
236 s 3 are each amended to read as follows:

If, under the terms
of a collective bargaining agreement or employer policy that applies to an
employee, the employee is entitled to sick leave or other paid time off, then an
employer shall allow an employee to use any or all of the employee's ((accrued))
choice of sick leave or other paid time off to care for a ((child
of the employee under the age of eighteen)) spouse, child, or parent of
the employee with a health condition that requires treatment or
supervision. Use of leave other than ((accrued)) sick leave or other
paid time off to care for a child, spouse, or parent under the
circumstances described in this section shall be governed by the terms of the
appropriate collective bargaining agreement or employer policy, as applicable.
If the appropriate collective bargaining agreement or employer policy, as
applicable, requires the employee to provide advance notice for vacation or
personal holiday time, then the employer may require the employee to comply
with the notice requirements of such agreement or policy.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
2. A new section is added
to chapter 49.12 RCW to read as follows:

The definitions in this
section apply throughout RCW 49.12.270 through 49.12.295 unless the context
clearly requires otherwise.

(1) "Child"
means a biological, adopted, or foster child, a stepchild, a legal ward, or a
child of a person standing in loco parentis who is: (a) Under eighteen years
of age; or (b) eighteen years of age or older and incapable of self-care
because of a mental or physical disability.

(2) "Parent"
means a biological parent of an employee or an individual who stood in loco
parentis to an employee when the employee was a child.

(3) "Sick leave or
other paid time off" includes time allowed under the terms of an
appropriate collective bargaining agreement or employer policy, as applicable,
to an employee for illness, vacation, and personal holiday, but does not
include paid time provided for jury duty or military duty.

(4) "Spouse"
means a husband or wife, as the case may be.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
3. A new section is added
to chapter 49.12 RCW to read as follows:

An
employer shall not discharge, threaten to discharge, demote, suspend,
discipline, or otherwise discriminate against an employee because the
employee: (1) Has exercised, or attempted to exercise, any right provided
under RCW 49.12.270 through 49.12.295; or (2) has filed a complaint, testified,
or assisted in any proceeding under RCW 49.12.270 through 49.12.295.

---
END ---