BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF
WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec.
1. The legislature declares
that a person has the ability to control decisions relating to his or her own
mental health care even when the person's ability to declare his or her choices
is impaired due to mental illness. The legislature recognizes that an advance
directive can be an essential tool for a person to express his or her choices
before the effects of mental illness deprive the person of the power to express
his or her instructions and preferences for mental health treatment. The
legislature affirms that, pursuant to other provisions of law, a mental health
advance directive created under this chapter should be respected by medical and
mental health professionals, guardians, attorneys-in-fact, and other surrogate
decision makers acting on behalf of the person who created it.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
2. The definitions in this
section apply throughout this chapter unless the context clearly requires
otherwise.

(1) "Adult"
means any person who has attained the age of majority as defined in RCW
26.28.010 or an emancipated minor.

(2) "Agent"
means an attorney-in-fact or agent as provided in chapter 11.94 RCW.

(3) "Incapacitated
person" means a person who is not a person with capacity and who has been
found to have a demonstrated inability to provide for essential health or
mental health care needs.

(4) "Mental
disorder" has the meaning given in RCW 71.05.020.

(5) "Mental health
advance directive" or "directive" means a written document in
which the person makes a declaration of instructions or preferences or appoints
an agent to make decisions on behalf of the person regarding the person's
mental health treatment and that is consistent with the provisions of this
chapter.

(6) "Mental health
professional" has the meaning given in RCW 71.05.020.

(7) "Person with
capacity" means an adult who has the ability to understand the
significance of a directive or its revocation and who acts free from fraud and
undue influence, and who has not been declared incapacitated under RCW 11.88.010.

(8) "Professional
person" has the meaning given in RCW 71.05.020.

(9)
"Psychiatrist" has the meaning given in RCW 71.05.020.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
3. (1) For the purposes of
this chapter, an adult is presumed to be a person with capacity. A person who
has been declared an incapacitated person may subsequently reassert his or her
capacity and it shall be presumed that the person has regained capacity until
he or she is declared otherwise.

(2) For the purposes of
this chapter, no adult may be declared an incapacitated person except by: (a)
Court order; or (b) the opinion of two mental health professionals, at least
one of whom is a psychiatrist.

(3) Where a court order
has stated that the person is a person with capacity and there is a subsequent
change in the person's condition, subsequent determinations whether the person
is incapacitated may be made by a court order or by the opinion of two mental
health professionals, at least one of whom is a psychiatrist.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
4. (1) A person with
capacity may create a directive.

(2) A directive may
include any provision relating to mental health treatment or the care of the
person or the person's personal affairs. Without limitation, a directive may
include:

(a) The person's
preferences and instructions for mental health treatment;

(b) Consent to specific
types of mental health treatment;

(c) Refusal to consent
to specific types of mental health treatment;

(d) Consent to admission
to and retention in a facility for mental health treatment;

(e) Descriptions of
situations that may cause the person to experience a mental health crisis;

(f) Suggested
alternative responses that may supplement or be in lieu of direct mental health
treatment, such as treatment approaches from other providers;

(g) Appointment of an
agent to make mental health treatment decisions on the person's behalf,
including authorizing the agent to provide consent on the person's behalf to
voluntary admission to inpatient mental health treatment consistent with
section 7 of this act;

(h) Consent to have the
person's health care information released to other providers or third parties;
and

(i) The person's
nomination of a guardian or limited guardian for consideration by the court if
guardianship proceedings are commenced.

(3)(a) A directive may
be combined with or be independent of the power of attorney authorized in
chapter 11.94 RCW or guardianship authorized in chapter 11.92 RCW, so long as
the processes for each are executed in accordance with its own statutes. If a
directive authorizes the appointment of an agent, the provisions of chapter
11.94 RCW and RCW 7.70.065 shall apply unless otherwise stated in this chapter.

(b) Unless provided
otherwise in either document, the directive or power of attorney most recently
created shall control as to any inconsistent mental health treatment
provisions.

(c) When a directive
created under this chapter is inconsistent with a directive created under
chapter 70.122 RCW, the most recently created directive shall control as to any
inconsistent provisions.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
5. (1) A directive shall:

(a) Be in writing;

(b) Contain language
that clearly indicates that the person intends to create a directive;

(c) Be dated and signed
by the person; and

(d) Be witnessed in
writing by at least two adults, each of whom shall certify that he or she
personally knows the person, was present when the person dated and signed the
directive, and that the person appeared to be a person with capacity.

(2) A witness may not
be any of the following:

(a) A person designated
to make health care decisions on the person's behalf;

(b) A professional
person directly involved with caring for the person at the time the directive
is executed;

(c) An owner, operator,
or relative of an owner or operator, or employee of a health care facility or
long-term care facility in which the person is a patient or resident;

(d) A person who is
related by blood, marriage, or adoption to the person; or

(e) A person who is
declared to be an incapacitated person.

(3) A directive
executed in accordance with this section is presumed to be valid.

(4) A directive may:

(a) Become operative
immediately or at a later time as designated in the directive;

(b) Be revoked, in
whole or in part, by the person who created it;

(c) Be revoked, in
whole or in part expressly or to the extent of any inconsistency, by a
subsequent directive;

(d) Expire under its
own terms;

(e) Be superseded or
revoked by a court order. To the extent a directive is not in conflict with a
court order, the directive remains effective.

(5) A directive that
would have otherwise expired but is operative because the person is an
incapacitated person remains operative until the person is no longer an
incapacitated person.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
6. (1)(a) Upon receiving a
directive, a professional person, or his or her designee, treating the person
shall make the directive a part of the person's medical record and shall be
deemed to have actual knowledge of its contents. Whenever possible, the
professional person, or his or her designee, shall inform the person or the
person's agent if he or she may be precluded from honoring all or part of the
directive based on the reasons in subsection (3) of this section.

(b) If no
physician-patient relationship has previously been established, nothing in this
statute requires the establishment of a physician-patient relationship.

(2) In the absence of
actual notice to the contrary, a professional person shall presume that a
person who created a directive was a person with capacity at the time the
directive was created and that the directive is valid.

(3) Subject to
subsections (6) and (7) of this section, a professional person who has been
presented with or has obtained a person's directive and who is treating the
person shall act in accordance with the provisions of the directive to the
fullest extent possible, consistent with applicable law. If the professional
person is at any time unable to comply, the professional person shall offer to
withdraw from treating the person, unless no other treatment provider is
reasonably available.

(4) If the directive
authorizes the appointment of an agent, the agent has the same right as the
person to receive and review the person's health care information, including
records and information pertaining to the person's mental health and alcohol or
substance abuse or dependency information. If the person consents in the
directive to having his or her health care information released to other
providers or third parties, the professional person's disclosure of health care
information shall not be a violation of chapter 70.02 RCW or any other
applicable law governing the disclosure of health care information.

(5) To the extent the
person has not waived the right to informed consent and except as provided in
chapter 71.05 RCW, the professional person shall attempt to obtain the person's
informed consent regarding all mental health treatment decisions. Treatment
under chapters 71.05 and 71.34 RCW shall be provided pursuant to the provisions
of those chapters, notwithstanding the requirement for informed consent under
this subsection.

(6) A professional
person who is treating a person involuntarily detained under chapter 71.05 or
71.34 RCW shall act in accordance with the provisions of the person's directive
to the fullest extent possible and as permitted by the applicable involuntary
detention laws, consistent with reasonable medical practice and the
availability of treatment.

(7)(a) A professional
person may decline to follow a provision that requires health care contrary to
generally accepted health care standards applicable to the professional person,
or that requires treatment that is not available despite reasonable efforts.

(b) The professional
person may provide treatment that is inconsistent with specific preferences or
instructions in the directive if the directive authorizes the professional
person to use his or her best medical judgment in cases of emergencies,
provided the treatment is in compliance with the laws governing the facility
treating the person.

(8)(a) A private or
public agency, government entity, or professional person, or personnel acting
under the direction of a professional person, or any health care facility or
long-term care facility is not subject to civil liability for failure to act in
accordance with a directive if that person does not have actual knowledge of
the directive.

(b) A private or public
agency, government entity, or professional person, or personnel acting under
the direction of a professional person, or any health care facility or
long-term care facility is not subject to civil liability for providing, in
good faith, mental health treatment to a person in accordance with the person's
directive.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
7. (1) If a person consents
in the directive, or authorizes an agent to consent on the person's behalf, to
voluntary admission to inpatient mental health treatment, the admission may not
exceed seventy-two hours, including weekends. If, after the seventy-two hour
period, the person does not consent to remain for additional treatment, the
patient must be released during reasonable daylight hours following the
expiration of the seventy-two hours.

(2) If a person
consents in the directive, or authorizes the agent to consent on the person's
behalf, to voluntary admission to inpatient mental health treatment and the
person subsequently refuses, orally or in writing, to be admitted, the refusal
shall constitute a revocation of that provision of the directive and any
admission to inpatient mental health treatment may only be imposed pursuant to
chapter 71.05 RCW.

(3) Nothing in this
chapter authorizes an agent to use or threaten physical force, abuse, neglect,
financial exploitation, or abandonment of the person, as those terms are
defined in RCW 74.34.020, to enforce or carry out a person's directive.

(4) Any person who is
voluntarily admitted to inpatient mental health treatment under this chapter,
or who consents to remain for additional treatment after the initial
seventy-two hour period, shall have no less than all the rights provided to
individuals who are voluntarily admitted to inpatient treatment under chapter
71.05 or 72.23 RCW. The continuing need for treatment of a person who consents
to remain for additional treatment under this chapter shall be reviewed by the
treating facility, and the person's agent if any, at least as frequently as set
forth for voluntary patients under chapter 71.05 or 72.23 RCW.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
8. (1) Except as provided in
section 7(2) of this act, a person with capacity may revoke a directive in
whole or in part by written statement at any time. The written statement of
revocation is effective when signed by the person and it is delivered to the
agent, if one is appointed, and the professional person who is responsible for
the delivery of mental health treatment to the person. The professional person
shall make the revocation part of the person's medical record.

(2)(a) If an agent or
professional person believes that the person seeking to revoke all or part of
the directive does not have capacity to revoke, the agent or professional
person may seek a determination of the person's capacity within forty-eight
hours of the attempted revocation.

(b) If a court or two
mental health professionals, one of whom is a psychiatrist, find that it is
more likely than not that the person did not have the capacity to revoke, then
the attempted revocation is invalid. If the court or two mental health
professionals, one of whom is a psychiatrist, find that it is more likely than
not that the person had the capacity to revoke the directive, the revocation is
valid. If a court is making the determination, the court shall, at a minimum,
be informed by the declaration of one mental health professional familiar with
the person and shall, except for good cause, give the alleged incapacitated
person an opportunity to appear in court prior to the court making its
determination. If a determination of the person's capacity to revoke has not
been made within forty-eight hours of the time the agent or professional person
seeks a determination, then it is presumed that the person had the capacity to
revoke the directive.

(3) A person declared
under this chapter to be an incapacitated person by a court or two mental
health professionals, one of whom is a psychiatrist, may not revoke a
directive. If an incapacitated person seeks to revoke all or part of the
directive, the agent or professional person may seek a determination of the
person's capacity to revoke within forty-eight hours of the attempted
revocation. If a determination of the person's capacity to revoke has not been
made within forty-eight hours of the time the agent or professional person
seeks a determination, then it is presumed that the incapacitated person had
the capacity to revoke the directive.

(4) A private or public
agency, government entity, or professional person, or personnel acting under
the direction of a professional person, or any health care facility or
long-term care facility participating in good faith in the mental health
treatment of a person is not civilly liable for failing to follow or act upon a
revocation if there was no actual knowledge of the revocation.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
9. Any person with good
reason to believe that a directive has been created or revoked under
circumstances amounting to falsification, forgery, or coercion may petition the
court for review under RCW 11.94.090 or 74.34.110 or for the appointment of a
guardian for the person.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
10. The fact that a person
has executed a directive does not constitute an indication of mental disorder
or that the person is not capable of providing informed consent.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
11. A person shall not be
required to execute or to refrain from executing a directive as a criterion for
insurance, as a condition for receiving mental or physical health services, or
as a condition of admission or discharge from a health care facility or
long-term care facility.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
12. A directive does not
limit any authority otherwise provided in Title 71 or 10 RCW, or any other
applicable state or federal laws to take a person into custody or to admit,
retain, or treat a person in a health care facility.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
13. The directive may, but is
not required to, be in the following form:

"PART I. STATEMENT
OF INTENT TO CREATE A MENTAL HEALTH ADVANCE DIRECTIVE

I,
. . . . . ., being a person with capacity, willfully
and voluntarily execute this mental health advance directive so that my choices
regarding my mental health care will be carried out either when I am declared
an incapacitated person or when I specify in this directive. If a guardian or
other decision maker is appointed by a court to make mental health decisions
for me, I intend this document to take precedence over all other means of
ascertaining my intent.

The fact that I may have
left blanks in this mental health advance directive should not affect its
validity in any way. I intend that all completed sections be followed. If I
have not expressed a choice, my agent should make the decision that he or she
determines is the decision I would make if I were capable to do so.

I intend this mental health
care advance directive to take precedence over any and all durable power of
attorney for health care documents and/or other advance directives I have
previously executed, to the extent that they are inconsistent with this
document, or unless I expressly state otherwise in this directive.

If I want to revoke all or
part of this mental health advance directive, I must do so by written statement
unless otherwise provided by law. I understand that I may revoke this advance
directive only if I am a person with capacity, and I cannot revoke this
directive during the period that a court or two mental health professionals, at
least one being a psychiatrist, find that I am an incapacitated person.

I understand that if I refuse
a treatment that I have said I wanted in this directive, I am not authorizing
my agent to use or threaten physical force, abuse, neglect, financial
exploitation, or abandonment of me to enforce or carry out my directive.

PART II. STATEMENT OF
INTENT REGARDING WHEN THIS DIRECTIVE BECOMES OPERATIVE

I intend that this
directive become operative (check only one):

. . . Immediately
upon my signing of this directive

. . . When the
following circumstances, symptoms, or behaviors occur:

.................................................................

. . . If I become
incapacitated.

PART III. STATEMENT OF
INTENT REGARDING PREFERENCES OR INSTRUCTIONS ABOUT TREATMENT, FACILITIES, AND
PHYSICIANS

A. Preferences or
Instructions About Physician(s) to Be Involved in My Treatment

I would like the physician
named below to be involved in my treatment decisions: Dr. ...................... Telephone
...............

I do not wish to be treated
by: .................................

B. Preferences or
Instructions About Other Providers

I am receiving other
treatment or care from providers who I feel have an impact on my mental health
care. I would like the following additional service provider(s) to be
contacted when this directive is operative:

Name .............. Profession
........... Telephone ..........

C. Preferences or
Instructions About Medications for Psychiatric Treatment

. . . I consent, and
authorize my agent (if named) to consent, to the following medications: ..........................................

.................................................................

. . . I
specifically do not consent and I do not authorize my agent (if named) to
consent to the administration of the following medications:

.................................................................

.................................................................

Consideration of Medications Not Listed Above (check one below)

. . . I am willing to
take the medications excluded above if my only reason for excluding them is the
side effects which include . . . . . . and these side
effects can be eliminated by dosage adjustment or other means.

. . . I am
willing to try any new medication the hospital doctor recommends.

. . . I am
willing to try any new medications my outpatient doctor recommends.

. . . I do not
want to try any new medications.

Medication Allergies

I have allergies to or
severe side effects from the following medications: .................................................................

.................................................................

Other Medication Preferences or Instructions

I have the following other
preferences or instructions about psychiatric medications: ....................................................

.................................................................

.................................................................

D. Preferences or
Instructions About Hospitalization and Alternatives

. . . (check if
desired) In the event my psychiatric condition is serious enough to require
24-hour care and I have no physical conditions that require immediate access to
emergency medical care, I would prefer to receive this care in
programs/facilities designed as alternatives to psychiatric hospitalizations.

I would also like the
interventions below to be tried, before hospitalization is considered (check
all that apply):

. . . Calling
someone or having someone call you when needed

. . . Staying
overnight with someone Name: . . . . Telephone: ...

. . . Having a
mental health service provider come to see you

. . . Going to a
crisis triage center or emergency room

. . . Staying
overnight at a crisis respite (temporary) bed

. . . Seeing a
service provider for help with psychiatric medications

. . . Other,
specify.............................................

Authority to Consent to Inpatient Treatment

I consent, and authorize my
agent (if named) to consent, to voluntary admission to inpatient mental health
treatment for a period not to exceed 72 hours (check one if desired):

. . . If deemed
appropriate by my agent (if named) and treating physician

. . . Under the
following circumstances (specify symptoms, behaviors, or circumstances that
indicate the need for hospitalization)

.................................................................

Hospital Preferences or Instructions

If hospitalization is
required, I prefer the following hospitals:

.................................................................

I do not wish to be
admitted to the following hospitals:

.................................................................

E. Preferences or
Instructions About Pre-Emergency Interventions

I would like the
interventions below to be tried before use of seclusion is considered (check
all that apply):

. . . "Talk
me down" one-on-one

. . . More
medication

. . . Time
out/privacy

. . . Show of
authority/force

. . . Shift my
attention to something else

. . . Set firm
limits

. . . Help me to
discuss/vent feelings

. . . Decrease
stimulation

. . . Offer to
have neutral person settle dispute

. . . Other,
specify ............................................

F. Preferences or
Instructions About Seclusion and Emergency Medications

If it is determined that I
am engaging in behavior that requires seclusion or emergency use of medication,
I prefer these interventions in the following order (rank "1" for
first choice, "2" for second choice, and so on):

. . . Seclusion

. . . Medication
by injection

. . . Medication
in pill or liquid form

. . . Other .....................................................

In the event that my
attending physician decides to use medication in response to an emergency
situation after due consideration of my preferences or instructions for
emergency treatments stated above, I expect the choice of medication to reflect
any preferences or instructions I have expressed in Part III C of this form.
The preferences or instructions I express in this section regarding medication
in emergency situations do not constitute consent to use of the medication for
nonemergency treatment.

G. Additional Instructions
About My Mental Health Care

Other instructions about my
mental health care: .................

.................................................................

PART IV. STATEMENT OF
INTENT TO APPOINT AN AGENT

I,
. . . . . ., authorize an agent to make mental health
treatment decisions on my behalf. The authority granted to my agent includes
the right to consent, refuse consent, or withdraw consent to any mental health
care, treatment, service, or procedure, consistent with any instructions and/or
limitations I have set forth in this advance directive. I intend that those
decisions should be made in accordance with my expressed wishes as set forth in
this document. If I have not expressed a choice in this document, I authorize
my agent to make the decision that my agent determines is the decision I would
make if I were capable to do so.

A. Designation of an Agent

I hereby appoint the
following person as my agent to make mental health care decisions for me as
authorized in this document and desire for this person to be notified
immediately when this directive becomes operative:

Name: ....................... Relationship:
.................

Address: ........................................................

Day Telephone: .............. Evening
Telephone: ............

Agent's Acceptance

I hereby accept the
designation as the agent for purposes described in this document (agent's
signature) ...............................

B. Designation of
Alternate Agent

If the person named above
is unavailable or unable to serve as my agent, I hereby appoint the following
person as my alternate agent and desire for this person to be notified
immediately when this directive becomes operative:

Name: ....................... Relationship:
.................

Address: ........................................................

Day Telephone: .............. Evening
Telephone: ............

Alternate Agent's
Acceptance

I hereby accept the
designation as the alternate agent for purposes described in this document
(alternate's signature) ..............

C. When My Spouse is My
Agent (check if desired)

. . . If my
spouse is my agent, I desire that person to remain as my agent even if we
become legally separated or our marriage is dissolved.

D. Limitations on My
Agent's Authority

I do not grant my agent the
authority to consent on my behalf to the following: ......................................................

E. Preference as to
Court-Appointed Guardian

In the event a court
decides to appoint a guardian who will make decisions regarding my mental
health treatment, I desire the following person to be appointed:

Name: ....................... Relationship:
.................

Address: ........................................................

Day Telephone: .............. Evening
Telephone: ............

The appointment of a
guardian of my estate or my person or any other decision maker shall not give
the guardian or decision maker the power to revoke, suspend, or terminate this
directive or the powers of my agent, except as specifically required by law.

PART V. PREFERENCES OR
INSTRUCTIONS ABOUT NOTIFICATION OF OTHERS, CARE OF PERSONAL AFFAIRS, AND
CONSENTS TO RELEASE TREATMENT INFORMATION

A. Who Should Be Notified

I desire staff to notify
the following individuals, in addition to my agent (if named) immediately when
this directive becomes operative:

Name: ....................... Relationship:
.................

Address: ........................................................

Day Telephone: .............. Evening
Telephone: ............

B. Who Should Not be
Permitted to Visit

If I have been admitted to
a mental health treatment facility, I do not wish the following people to be
permitted to visit me there:

Name: ....................... Relationship:
.................

C. Consents to Obtain
Previous Treatment Records

I consent to release
treatment records from the following previous treatment providers upon request
by treatment providers acting under this mental health advance directive:

Provider(s): ....................................................

D. Consents to Release
Treatment Information

I consent to release
relevant treatment information to the following individuals in addition to my
agent and current treatment providers:

Name: ....................... Relationship:
.................

Address: ........................................................

Day Telephone: .............. Evening
Telephone: ............

E. Preferences or
Instructions About Personal Affairs

I have the following
preferences or instructions about my personal affairs (e.g., care of
dependents, pets, household) if I am admitted to a mental health treatment
facility: ......................................

PART VI. DURATION OF MY
MENTAL HEALTH ADVANCE DIRECTIVE

. . . I want this
mental health advance directive to remain valid and in effect for an indefinite
period of time.

. . . I want this
mental health advance directive to automatically expire within . . .
years from the date it was created.

PART VII. SIGNATURE

By signing here, I indicate
that I understand the purpose and effect of this document.

.................................................................

Signature Date

The directive above was
signed and declared by the "Declarant,"
. . . . . . to be his or her mental health advance
directive, in our presence who, at his or her request, have signed names below
as witness. We declare that, at the time of the creation of this instrument,
the Declarant is personally known to us, and, according to our best knowledge
and belief, was a person with capacity at the time. We further declare that
none of us is: (1) A person designated to make medical decisions on the
person's behalf; (2) a mental health professional or other professional person
directly involved with the provision of care to the person at the time the
mental health advance directive is executed; (3) an owner, operator, or
relative of an owner or operator, or employee of a health care facility or
long-term care facility in which the person is a patient or resident; (4) a
person who is related by blood, marriage, or adoption to the person; or (5) an
incapacitated person.

Dated at
. . . . . . . . . . .
(county, state),

this
. . . . . . day of . . . . . . of
. . . ..

Witness 1 Witness
2

........................ .......................

Signature............... Signature

................... .......................

Printed Name....... Printed
Name

................... .......................

................... .......................

Address............ Address

PART VIII. RECORD OF
ADVANCE DIRECTIVE

I have given a copy of this
mental health advance directive to the following persons: ..............................................

PART IX. REVOCATION OF
MY ADVANCE DIRECTIVE

. . . I am
revoking the following part(s) of this directive (specify):

.................................................................

. . . I am
revoking all of this directive.

By signing here, I indicate
that I understand the purpose and effect of my revocation.

.................................................................

Signature Date"

Sec. 14. RCW 11.94.010 and 1995 c
297 s 9 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) Whenever a
principal designates another as his or her attorney in fact or agent, by a
power of attorney in writing, and the writing contains the words "This
power of attorney shall not be affected by disability of the principal,"
or "This power of attorney shall become effective upon the disability of
the principal," or similar words showing the intent of the principal that
the authority conferred shall be exercisable notwithstanding the principal's
disability, the authority of the attorney in fact or agent is exercisable on
behalf of the principal as provided notwithstanding later disability or
incapacity of the principal at law or later uncertainty as to whether the
principal is dead or alive. All acts done by the attorney in fact or agent
pursuant to the power during any period of disability or incompetence or
uncertainty as to whether the principal is dead or alive have the same effect
and inure to the benefit of and bind the principal or the principal's guardian
or heirs, devisees, and personal representative as if the principal were alive,
competent, and not disabled. A principal may nominate, by a durable power of
attorney, the guardian or limited guardian of his or her estate or person for
consideration by the court if protective proceedings for the principal's person
or estate are thereafter commenced. The court shall make its appointment in
accordance with the principal's most recent nomination in a durable power of
attorney except for good cause or disqualification. If a guardian thereafter
is appointed for the principal, the attorney in fact or agent, during the
continuance of the appointment, shall account to the guardian rather than the
principal. The guardian has the same power the principal would have had if the
principal were not disabled or incompetent, to revoke, suspend or terminate all
or any part of the power of attorney or agency.

(2) Persons shall place
reasonable reliance on any determination of disability or incompetence as
provided in the instrument that specifies the time and the circumstances under
which the power of attorney document becomes effective.

(3)(a) A
principal may authorize his or her attorney-in-fact to provide informed consent
for health care decisions on the principal's behalf. If a principal has
created both a power of attorney and a directive, pursuant to chapter 71.-- RCW
(sections 1 through 13 of this act), authorizing an agent to make mental health
care decisions on the person's behalf, the directive or power of attorney most
recently created shall be construed to contain the person's most recent mental
health treatment preferences and instructions, unless provided otherwise in
either document. An attorney-in-fact appointed under a mental health advance
directive has the same right as the principal to receive and review the
principal's medical records relating to mental health treatment. If the
principal so states in the mental health advance directive, an attorney-in-fact
may provide consent on behalf of the principal to voluntary admission to
inpatient mental health treatment for a period not to exceed seventy-two hours.

(b) Unless he or
she is the spouse, or adult child or brother or sister of the principal, none
of the following persons may act as the attorney-in-fact for the principal or
as an agent in a mental health advance directive: Any of the principal's
physicians, the physicians' employees, or the owners, administrators, or
employees of the health care facility or long-term care facility where
the principal resides or receives care. Except as provided in subsection
(a) of this subsection, this authorization is subject to the same
limitations as those that apply to a guardian under RCW 11.92.043(5) (a)
through (c).

Sec. 15. RCW 11.88.010 and 1991 c
289 s 1 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) The superior court
of each county shall have power to appoint guardians for the persons and/or
estates of incapacitated persons, and guardians for the estates of nonresidents
of the state who have property in the county needing care and attention.

(a) For purposes of
this chapter, a person may be deemed incapacitated as to person when the
superior court determines the individual has a significant risk of personal
harm based upon a demonstrated inability to adequately provide for nutrition,
health, housing, or physical safety.

(b) For purposes of
this chapter, a person may be deemed incapacitated as to the person's estate
when the superior court determines the individual is at significant risk of
financial harm based upon a demonstrated inability to adequately manage
property or financial affairs.

(c) A determination of
incapacity is a legal not a medical decision, based upon a demonstration of
management insufficiencies over time in the area of person or estate. Age,
eccentricity, poverty, or medical diagnosis alone shall not be sufficient to
justify a finding of incapacity.

(d) A person may also
be determined incapacitated if he or she is under the age of majority as
defined in RCW 26.28.010.

(e) For purposes of
giving informed consent for health care pursuant to RCW 7.70.050 and 7.70.065,
an "incompetent" person is any person who is (i) incompetent by
reason of mental illness, developmental disability, senility, habitual
drunkenness, excessive use of drugs, or other mental incapacity, of either
managing his or her property or caring for himself or herself, or both, or (ii)
incapacitated as defined in (a), (b), or (d) of this subsection.

(f) For purposes of the
terms "incompetent," "disabled," or "not legally
competent," as those terms are used in the Revised Code of Washington to
apply to persons incapacitated under this chapter, those terms shall be
interpreted to mean "incapacitated" persons for purposes of this
chapter.

(2) The superior court
for each county shall have power to appoint limited guardians for the persons
and estates, or either thereof, of incapacitated persons, who by reason of
their incapacity have need for protection and assistance, but who are capable
of managing some of their personal and financial affairs. After considering
all evidence presented as a result of such investigation, the court shall impose,
by order, only such specific limitations and restrictions on an incapacitated
person to be placed under a limited guardianship as the court finds necessary
for such person's protection and assistance. A person shall not be presumed to
be incapacitated nor shall a person lose any legal rights or suffer any legal
disabilities as the result of being placed under a limited guardianship, except
as to those rights and disabilities specifically set forth in the court order
establishing such a limited guardianship. In addition, the court order shall
state the period of time for which it shall be applicable.

(3) Venue for petitions
for guardianship or limited guardianship shall lie in the county wherein the
alleged incapacitated person is domiciled, or if such person resides in a
facility supported in whole or in part by local, state, or federal funding
sources, in either the county where the facility is located, the county of
domicile prior to residence in the supported facility, or the county where a
parent or spouse of the alleged incapacitated person is domiciled.

If the alleged
incapacitated person's residency has changed within one year of the filing of
the petition, any interested person may move for a change of venue for any
proceedings seeking the appointment of a guardian or a limited guardian under
this chapter to the county of the alleged incapacitated person's last place of
residence of one year or more. The motion shall be granted when it appears to
the court that such venue would be in the best interests of the alleged
incapacitated person and would promote more complete consideration of all
relevant matters.

(4) Under RCW 11.94.010
or chapter 71.-- RCW (sections 1 through 13 of this act), a principal
may nominate, by a durable power of attorney or the mental health advance
directive, the guardian or limited guardian of his or her estate or person
for consideration by the court if guardianship proceedings for the principal's
person or estate are thereafter commenced. The court shall make its appointment
in accordance with the principal's most recent nomination in a durable power of
attorney or mental health advance directive except for good cause or
disqualification.

(5) When a court
imposes a full guardianship for an incapacitated person, the person shall be
considered incompetent for purposes of rationally exercising the right to vote
and shall lose the right to vote, unless the court specifically finds that the
person is rationally capable of exercising the franchise. Imposition of a
limited guardianship for an incapacitated person shall not result in the loss
of the right to vote unless the court determines that the person is incompetent
for purposes of rationally exercising the franchise.

Sec. 16. RCW 11.88.030 and 1996 c
249 s 8 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) Any person or
entity may petition for the appointment of a qualified person, trust company,
national bank, or nonprofit corporation authorized in RCW 11.88.020 as the
guardian or limited guardian of an incapacitated person. No liability for
filing a petition for guardianship or limited guardianship shall attach to a
petitioner acting in good faith and upon reasonable basis. A petition for
guardianship or limited guardianship shall state:

(a) The name, age,
residence, and post office address of the alleged incapacitated person;

(b) The nature of the
alleged incapacity in accordance with RCW 11.88.010;

(c) The approximate
value and description of property, including any compensation, pension, insurance,
or allowance, to which the alleged incapacitated person may be entitled;

(d) Whether there is,
in any state, a guardian or limited guardian, or pending guardianship action
for the person or estate of the alleged incapacitated person;

(e) The residence and
post office address of the person whom petitioner asks to be appointed guardian
or limited guardian;

(f) The names and
addresses, and nature of the relationship, so far as known or can be reasonably
ascertained, of the persons most closely related by blood or marriage to the
alleged incapacitated person;

(g) The name and
address of the person or facility having the care and custody of the alleged
incapacitated person;

(h) The reason why the
appointment of a guardian or limited guardian is sought and the interest of the
petitioner in the appointment, and whether the appointment is sought as
guardian or limited guardian of the person, the estate, or both;

(i) A description of
any alternate arrangements previously made by the alleged incapacitated person,
such as trusts, advance directives for mental health care, or powers of
attorney, including identifying any guardianship nominations contained in a
power of attorney, and why a guardianship is nevertheless necessary;

(j) The nature and
degree of the alleged incapacity and the specific areas of protection and
assistance requested and the limitation of rights requested to be included in
the court's order of appointment;

(k) The requested term
of the limited guardianship to be included in the court's order of appointment;

(l) Whether the
petitioner is proposing a specific individual to act as guardian ad litem and,
if so, the individual's knowledge of or relationship to any of the parties, and
why the individual is proposed.

(2)(a) The attorney
general may petition for the appointment of a guardian or limited guardian in
any case in which there is cause to believe that a guardianship is necessary
and no private party is able and willing to petition.

(b) Prepayment of a
filing fee shall not be required in any guardianship or limited guardianship
brought by the attorney general. Payment of the filing fee shall be ordered
from the estate of the incapacitated person at the hearing on the merits of the
petition, unless in the judgment of the court, such payment would impose a
hardship upon the incapacitated person, in which case the filing shall be
waived.

(3) No filing fee shall
be charged by the court for filing either a petition for guardianship or a
petition for limited guardianship if the petition alleges that the alleged
incapacitated person has total assets of a value of less than three thousand
dollars.

(4)(a) Notice that a
guardianship proceeding has been commenced shall be personally served upon the
alleged incapacitated person and the guardian ad litem along with a copy of the
petition for appointment of a guardian. Such notice shall be served not more
than five court days after the petition has been filed.

(b) Notice under this
subsection shall include a clear and easily readable statement of the legal
rights of the alleged incapacitated person that could be restricted or
transferred to a guardian by a guardianship order as well as the right to
counsel of choice and to a jury trial on the issue of incapacity. Such notice
shall be in substantially the following form and shall be in capital letters,
double-spaced, and in a type size not smaller than ten-point type:

IMPORTANT
NOTICE

PLEASE
READ CAREFULLY

A PETITION TO HAVE A
GUARDIAN APPOINTED FOR YOU HAS BEEN FILED IN THE
. . . . . . COUNTY SUPERIOR COURT BY
. . . . . . IF A GUARDIAN IS APPOINTED, YOU COULD
LOSE ONE OR MORE OF THE FOLLOWING RIGHTS:

(1) TO MARRY OR
DIVORCE;

(2) TO VOTE OR HOLD AN
ELECTED OFFICE;

(3) TO ENTER INTO A
CONTRACT OR MAKE OR REVOKE A WILL;

(4) TO APPOINT SOMEONE
TO ACT ON YOUR BEHALF;

(5) TO SUE AND BE SUED
OTHER THAN THROUGH A GUARDIAN;

(6) TO POSSESS A
LICENSE TO DRIVE;

(7) TO BUY, SELL, OWN,
MORTGAGE, OR LEASE PROPERTY;

(8) TO CONSENT TO OR
REFUSE MEDICAL TREATMENT;

(9) TO DECIDE WHO SHALL
PROVIDE CARE AND ASSISTANCE;

(10) TO MAKE DECISIONS
REGARDING SOCIAL ASPECTS OF YOUR LIFE.

UNDER THE LAW, YOU HAVE
CERTAIN RIGHTS.

YOU HAVE THE RIGHT TO BE
REPRESENTED BY A LAWYER OF YOUR OWN CHOOSING. THE COURT WILL APPOINT A LAWYER
TO REPRESENT YOU IF YOU ARE UNABLE TO PAY OR PAYMENT WOULD RESULT IN A
SUBSTANTIAL HARDSHIP TO YOU.

YOU HAVE THE RIGHT TO ASK
FOR A JURY TO DECIDE WHETHER OR NOT YOU NEED A GUARDIAN TO HELP YOU.

YOU HAVE THE RIGHT TO BE
PRESENT IN COURT AND TESTIFY WHEN THE HEARING IS HELD TO DECIDE WHETHER OR NOT
YOU NEED A GUARDIAN. IF A GUARDIAN AD LITEM IS APPOINTED, YOU HAVE THE RIGHT
TO REQUEST THE COURT TO REPLACE THAT PERSON.

(5) All petitions filed
under the provisions of this section shall be heard within sixty days unless an
extension of time is requested by a party or the guardian ad litem within such
sixty day period and granted for good cause shown. If an extension is granted,
the court shall set a new hearing date.

Sec. 17. RCW 7.70.065 and 1987 c
162 s 1 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) Informed consent
for health care for a patient who is not competent, as defined in RCW
11.88.010(1)(((b))) (e), to consent may be obtained from a person
authorized to consent on behalf of such patient. Persons authorized to provide
informed consent to health care on behalf of a patient who is not competent to
consent shall be a member of one of the following classes of persons in the
following order of priority:

(a) The appointed
guardian of the patient, if any;

(b) The individual, if
any, to whom the patient has given a durable power of attorney or mental
health advance directive that encompasses the authority to make health care
or mental health care decisions;

(c) The patient's
spouse;

(d) Children of the
patient who are at least eighteen years of age;

(e) Parents of the
patient; and

(f) Adult brothers and
sisters of the patient.

(2) If the physician
seeking informed consent for proposed health care of the patient who is not
competent to consent makes reasonable efforts to locate and secure
authorization from a competent person in the first or succeeding class and
finds no such person available, authorization may be given by any person in the
next class in the order of descending priority. However, no person under this
section may provide informed consent to health care:

(a) If a person of
higher priority under this section has refused to give such authorization; or

(b) If there are two or
more individuals in the same class and the decision is not unanimous among all
available members of that class.

(3) Before any person
authorized to provide informed consent on behalf of a patient not competent to
consent exercises that authority, the person must first determine in good faith
that that patient, if competent, would consent to the proposed health care. If
such a determination cannot be made, the decision to consent to the proposed
health care may be made only after determining that the proposed health care is
in the patient's best interests.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
18. Nothing in this act
creates a legal right or cause of action. Nothing in this act denies or alters
any existing legal right or cause of action nor may it be relied upon to compel
the establishment of any program or special entitlement.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
19. Sections 1 through 13 of
this act constitute a new chapter in Title 71 RCW.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 20. If any provision of this
act or its application to any person or circumstance is held invalid, the
remainder of the act or the application of the provision to other persons or
circumstances is not affected.

---
END ---