BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF
WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec.
1. (1) All powers, duties,
and functions of the state fish and wildlife commission are transferred to the
legislative fish and wildlife committee. All references to the state fish and
wildlife commission in the Revised Code of Washington shall be construed to
mean the legislative fish and wildlife committee when referring to the
functions transferred in this section.

(2)(a) All reports,
documents, surveys, books, records, files, papers, or written material in the
possession of the state fish and wildlife commission pertaining to the powers,
functions, and duties transferred shall be delivered to the custody of the
legislative fish and wildlife committee. All cabinets, furniture, office
equipment, motor vehicles, and other tangible property employed by the state
fish and wildlife commission in carrying out the powers, functions, and duties
transferred shall be made available to the legislative fish and wildlife
committee. All funds, credits, or other assets held in connection with the
powers, functions, and duties transferred shall be assigned to the legislative
fish and wildlife committee.

(b) Any appropriations
made to the state fish and wildlife commission for carrying out the powers,
functions, and duties transferred shall, on the effective date of this section,
be transferred and credited to the legislative fish and wildlife committee.

(c) Whenever any
question arises as to the transfer of any personnel, funds, books, documents,
records, papers, files, equipment, or other tangible property used or held in
the exercise of the powers and the performance of the duties and functions
transferred, the director of financial management shall make a determination as
to the proper allocation and certify the same to the state agencies concerned.

(3) All rules and all
pending business before the state fish and wildlife commission pertaining to
the powers, functions, and duties transferred shall be continued and acted upon
by the legislative fish and wildlife committee. All existing contracts and
obligations shall remain in full force and shall be performed by the
legislative fish and wildlife committee.

(4) The transfer of the
powers, duties, functions, and personnel of the state fish and wildlife
commission shall not affect the validity of any act performed before the
effective date of this section.

(5) If apportionments
of budgeted funds are required because of the transfers directed by this
section, the director of financial management shall certify the apportionments
to the agencies affected, the state auditor, and the state treasurer. Each of
these shall make the appropriate transfer and adjustments in funds and
appropriation accounts and equipment records in accordance with the
certification.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
2. The legislative fish and
wildlife committee is created. The committee consists of six senators to be
appointed by the president of the senate and six members of the house of
representatives to be appointed by the speaker of the house of
representatives. Not more than three members from the senate or the house of
representatives may be from the same political party. A list of appointees
must be submitted before the close of each regular legislative session during
an odd-numbered year or any successive special session convened by the governor
or the legislature prior to the close of the regular session or a successive
special session for confirmation of senate members, by the senate, and house of
representative members, by the house of representatives. Vacancies occurring
must be filled by the appointing authority. All vacancies must be filled from
the same political party and from the same chamber as the member whose seat was
vacated. The committee must adopt rules and procedures for its orderly
operation.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
3. The committee must:

(1) Adopt rules and
establish direction for implementing legislative policy for fish and wildlife
species;

(2) Monitor the
department's implementation of the goals, policies, and objectives established
by the committee;

(3) Classify wildlife
and adopt rules governing the time, place, manner, and methods used to harvest
or enjoy fish and wildlife;

(4) Handle all general
administrative and personnel duties related to the committee;

(5) Determine the
number of committee staff needed to fulfill the duties of the committee;

(6) Establish policies
for committee staff;

(7) Adopt an interim
work plan and meeting schedule; and

(8) Approve all
contracts signed on behalf of the committee.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
4. The fish and wildlife
citizen advisory council is created, and is composed of nine members appointed
by the governor. Persons eligible for appointment as members of the fish and
wildlife citizens advisory council must have general knowledge of the habits
and distribution of fish and wildlife and may not hold another state, county,
or municipal elective or appointive office. The governor must appoint the
members of the fish and wildlife citizens advisory council with the advice and
consent of the senate. In making these appointments, the governor must seek to
maintain a balance reflecting all aspects of fish and wildlife, including
representation recommended by organized groups representing sportfishers,
commercial fishers, hunters, private landowners, and environmentalists. Three
members of the fish and wildlife citizens advisory council must be residents of
that portion of the state lying east of the summit of the Cascade mountains,
and three members must be residents of that portion of the state lying west of
the summit of the Cascade mountains. Three additional members of the fish and
wildlife citizens advisory council are appointed at-large. No two members may
be residents of the same county. Members of the fish and wildlife citizens
advisory council serve four‑year terms. Of the initial members appointed
to the council, three members serve two-year terms, three members serve
three-year terms, and three members serve four-year terms. Thereafter, members
of the council are appointed to four‑year terms. Vacancies to the fish
and wildlife citizens advisory council must be filled by appointment in the same
manner as the original appointment for the remainder of the unexpired term of
the position being vacated. Members must be reimbursed for travel expenses as
provided in RCW 43.03.050 and 43.03.060.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
5. (1) The fish and wildlife
citizen advisory council is authorized and directed to ascertain, study, and
analyze all available facts and matters relating or pertaining to:

(a) Wildlife, fish, and
shellfish in the state;

(b) Preservation,
protection, and management of wildlife, food fish, game fish, and shellfish in
the waters of the state and offshore water;

(c) Conserving the
wildlife, food fish, game fish, and shellfish resources in a manner that does
not impair the resource;

(d) The department's
mandate to maintain the economic well-being and stability of the state's
fishing industry;

(e) The department's
actions to promote orderly fisheries in the state, and to enhance and improve
recreational and commercial fishing in the state;

(f) The taking of wildlife,
food fish, game fish, and shellfish in the state as authorized by the
committee;

(g) The committee's
efforts to maximize the public recreational game fishing and hunting
opportunities of all citizens, including juveniles, disabled persons, and senior
citizens;

(h) The department's
work with volunteer groups and individuals to achieve the goals expressed in
Title 77 RCW; and

(i) Bills assigned to
the natural resources committees in the senate and the house of
representatives.

(2) The fish and wildlife
citizens advisory council is authorized to ascertain, study, and analyze all
available facts and matters relating or pertaining to sources of revenue,
appropriations, expenditures, and the financial condition of the state wildlife
fund and all other funds or accounts related to fish and wildlife programs of
the state.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
6. Sections 1 through 5 of
this act take effect June 30, 2002.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 7. Sections 1 through 6 of
this act constitute a new chapter in Title 77 RCW.

---
END ---