BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF
WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec.
1. A new section is added
to chapter 87.03 RCW to read as follows:

(1) The owner or owners
in fee of a tract of land of one acre or less that constitute a portion of an
irrigation district may have their land excluded from the irrigation district
under the following conditions:

(a) The irrigation
district water is accessible to the tract of land but the owner or owners in
fee have not accessed the water for the past five consecutive years; or

(b) The irrigation
district water is not accessible to the tract of land and has not been
accessible for the past five consecutive years.

(2) The
owner or owners in fee of a tract of land of one acre or less that constitute a
portion of an irrigation district who meet the requirements of this section may
notify in writing the board of directors of such district to declare their
intention to exclude the tract of land from the district. The board of
directors, upon receipt of the notification, has ninety days to enter an order
excluding the tract of land from the district. Such order shall be entered
upon the minutes of the board and certified to the office of the county
treasurer.

--- END ---