BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF
WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1. RCW 36.80.010 and 1997 c
147 s 1 are each amended to read as follows:

((The
county legislative authority of each county with a population of eight thousand
or more shall employ a full-time county road engineer.)) The county
legislative authority of each ((other)) county shall employ a county road
engineer on either a full-time or part-time basis, or may contract with another
county for the engineering services of a county road engineer from such other
county.

--- END ---