BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF
WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1. RCW 70.96A.095 and 1998
c 296 s 23 are each amended to read as follows:

Any person ((thirteen))
sixteen years of age or older may give consent for himself or herself to
the furnishing of outpatient treatment by a chemical dependency treatment
program certified by the department. Parental authorization is required for
any treatment of a minor under the age of ((thirteen)) sixteen.

Sec. 2. RCW 70.96A.230 and 1998
c 296 s 24 are each amended to read as follows:

Any provider of
outpatient treatment who provides outpatient treatment to a minor ((thirteen))
sixteen years of age or older shall provide notice of the minor's
request for treatment to the minor's parents if: (1) The minor signs a written
consent authorizing the disclosure; or (2) the treatment program director
determines that the minor lacks capacity to make a rational choice regarding
consenting to disclosure. The notice shall be made within seven days of the
request for treatment, excluding Saturdays, Sundays, and holidays, and shall
contain the name, location, and telephone number of the facility providing
treatment, and the name of a professional person on the staff of the facility
providing treatment who is designated to discuss the minor's need for treatment
with the parent.

Sec. 3. RCW 70.96A.235 and 1998
c 296 s 25 are each amended to read as follows:

Parental consent is
required for inpatient chemical dependency treatment of a minor, unless the
child meets the definition of a child in need of services in RCW 13.32A.030(((4)))
(5)(c) as determined by the department: PROVIDED, That parental consent
is required for any treatment of a minor under the age of ((thirteen)) sixteen.

This section does not
apply to petitions filed under this chapter.

Sec. 4. RCW 71.34.030 and 1998 c
296 s 12 are each amended to read as follows:

Any minor ((thirteen))
sixteen years or older may request and receive outpatient treatment
without the consent of the minor's parent. Parental authorization is required
for outpatient treatment of a minor under the age of ((thirteen)) sixteen.

Sec. 5. RCW 71.34.040 and 1985 c
354 s 4 are each amended to read as follows:

If a minor, ((thirteen))
sixteen years or older, is brought to an evaluation and treatment
facility or hospital emergency room for immediate mental health services, the
professional person in charge of the facility shall evaluate the minor's mental
condition, determine whether the minor suffers from a mental disorder, and
whether the minor is in need of immediate inpatient treatment. If it is
determined that the minor suffers from a mental disorder, inpatient treatment
is required, the minor is unwilling to consent to voluntary admission, and the
professional person believes that the minor meets the criteria for initial
detention set forth herein, the facility may detain or arrange for the detention
of the minor for up to twelve hours in order to enable a county-designated
mental health professional to evaluate the minor and commence initial detention
proceedings under the provisions of this chapter.

Sec. 6. RCW 71.34.042 and 1998 c
296 s 14 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) A minor ((thirteen))
sixteen years or older may admit himself or herself to an evaluation and
treatment facility for inpatient mental treatment, without parental consent.
The admission shall occur only if the professional person in charge of the
facility concurs with the need for inpatient treatment.

(2) When, in the
judgment of the professional person in charge of an evaluation and treatment
facility, there is reason to believe that a minor is in need of inpatient
treatment because of a mental disorder, and the facility provides the type of
evaluation and treatment needed by the minor, and it is not feasible to treat
the minor in any less restrictive setting or the minor's home, the minor may be
admitted to an evaluation and treatment facility.

(3) Written renewal of
voluntary consent must be obtained from the applicant no less than once every
twelve months. The minor's need for continued inpatient treatments shall be
reviewed and documented no less than every one hundred eighty days.

Sec. 7. RCW 71.34.046 and 1998 c
296 s 16 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) Any minor ((thirteen))
sixteen years or older voluntarily admitted to an evaluation and
treatment facility under RCW 71.34.042 may give notice of intent to leave at
any time. The notice need not follow any specific form so long as it is
written and the intent of the minor can be discerned.

(2) The staff member
receiving the notice shall date it immediately, record its existence in the
minor's clinical record, and send copies of it to the minor's attorney, if any,
the county-designated mental health professional, and the parent.

(3) The professional
person shall discharge the minor, ((thirteen)) sixteen years or
older, from the facility upon receipt of the minor's notice of intent to leave.

Sec. 8. RCW 71.34.050 and 1995 c
312 s 53 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) When a
county-designated mental health professional receives information that a minor,
((thirteen)) sixteen years or older, as a result of a mental
disorder presents a likelihood of serious harm or is gravely disabled, has
investigated the specific facts alleged and of the credibility of the person or
persons providing the information, and has determined that voluntary admission
for inpatient treatment is not possible, the county-designated mental health
professional may take the minor, or cause the minor to be taken, into custody
and transported to an evaluation and treatment facility providing inpatient
treatment.

If the minor is not
taken into custody for evaluation and treatment, the parent who has custody of
the minor may seek review of that decision made by the county designated mental
health professional in court. The parent shall file notice with the court and
provide a copy of the county designated mental health professional's report or
notes.

(2) Within twelve hours
of the minor's arrival at the evaluation and treatment facility, the
county-designated mental health professional shall serve on the minor a copy of
the petition for initial detention, notice of initial detention, and statement
of rights. The county-designated mental health professional shall file with
the court on the next judicial day following the initial detention the original
petition for initial detention, notice of initial detention, and statement of
rights along with an affidavit of service. The county-designated mental health
professional shall commence service of the petition for initial detention and
notice of the initial detention on the minor's parent and the minor's attorney
as soon as possible following the initial detention.

(3) At the time of
initial detention, the county-designated mental health professional shall
advise the minor both orally and in writing that if admitted to the evaluation
and treatment facility for inpatient treatment, a commitment hearing shall be
held within seventy-two hours of the minor's provisional acceptance to
determine whether probable cause exists to commit the minor for further mental
health treatment.

The minor shall be
advised that he or she has a right to communicate immediately with an attorney
and that he or she has a right to have an attorney appointed to represent him
or her before and at the hearing if the minor is indigent.

(4) Whenever the county
designated mental health professional petitions for detention of a minor under
this chapter, an evaluation and treatment facility providing seventy-two hour
evaluation and treatment must immediately accept on a provisional basis the
petition and the person. Within twenty-four hours of the minor's arrival, the
facility must evaluate the minor's condition and either admit or release the
minor in accordance with this chapter.

(5) If a
minor is not approved for admission by the inpatient evaluation and treatment
facility, the facility shall make such recommendations and referrals for
further care and treatment of the minor as necessary.

---
END ---