BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF
WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec.
1. A new section is added
to chapter 82.08 RCW to read as follows:

(1) The tax levied by
RCW 82.08.020 does not apply to the sale of a funeral casket that is made by a
funeral director licensed under chapter 18.39 RCW as part of the provision of a
funeral service.

(2) "Funeral
service" has the same meaning as provided under chapter 18.39 RCW.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
2. A new section is added
to chapter 82.12 RCW to read as follows:

(1) The provisions of
this chapter do not apply in respect to the use of a funeral casket for a
funeral service.

(2) "Funeral
service" has the same meaning as provided under chapter 18.39 RCW.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 3. This act takes effect
January 1, 2003.

---
END ---