BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF
WASHINGTON:

LEGISLATIVE INTENT

NEW SECTION. Sec.
1. Most state constitutions
have similar preambles that acknowledge the Supreme Ruler of the universe,
Almighty God, or providence for the gift of liberty. Government is then given
the constitutional responsibility to protect and maintain individual rights.
This is the fundamental reason given in the Declaration of Independence for
creating the United States of America. Yet our schools neglect to teach this
principle.

The people want to give
children, and their children's children, the blessings of liberty. Schools
must teach the constitution for this to happen. This is not a separation of
church and state issue. The issue is teaching the substance and meanings of
the liberties provided by the United States and Washington state Constitutions.

POLICIES AND PURPOSES

NEW SECTION. Sec.
2. A new section is added
to chapter 28A.230 RCW to read as follows:

RCW 28A.230.170
states: "The study of the Constitution of the United States and the
Constitution of the state of Washington shall be a condition prerequisite to
graduation from public and private high schools of this state." However,
the courts have ruled "any study constitutes study." Therefore, the
superintendent of public instruction has left it up to the teacher. Teachers
have not provided any noticeable instruction on the Washington state
Constitution.

This measure requires
public and private school libraries to stock printed copies of the Declaration
of Independence, the United States Constitution, the Washington state
Constitution, the federalists papers, and the anti-federalist papers. Each
classroom shall display the preamble and the first twelve sections of Article I
of the Washington state Constitution in school classrooms.

RELATING THE
DECLARATION OF INDEPENDENCE TO THE CONSTITUTIONS

OF THE UNITED STATES AND THE STATE OF
WASHINGTON

Sec. 3. RCW 28A.230.170 and 1985
c 341 s 1 are each amended to read as follows:

The study of the
Constitution of the United States and the Constitution of the state of
Washington shall be a condition prerequisite to graduation from the public and
private high schools of this state. The state board of education acting upon
the advice of the superintendent of public instruction shall provide by rule ((or
regulation)) for the implementation of this section into the K-12 social
studies curriculum. Local school boards are responsible for providing books
that explain the meaning and substance of the Constitutions of the United
States and the state of Washington. Local school boards are responsible for
displaying copies of the Declaration of Independence, the Bill of Rights, the
United States Constitution, and the Washington state Constitution.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
4. A new section is added
to chapter 28A.230 RCW to read as follows:

The word
"study" in RCW 28A.230.170 includes:

(1) Illustrating, by
teacher instruction, how the Declaration of Independence provided the outline
for both the United States Constitution and the Washington state Constitution;

(2) Relating each
section of the Washington state Constitution to statements made in the
Declaration of Independence and the United States Constitution;

(3) Teaching the
heritage and meaning of this statement from the Declaration of Independence:
"We hold these truths to be self-evident, that all men are created equal,
that they are endowed by their creator with certain unalienable rights, that
among these are life, liberty, and the pursuit of happiness. That to secure
these rights, governments are instituted among men, deriving their just powers
from the consent of the governed." Suggested sources are: The Magna
Carta (1215), the 1628 Petition of Right to King Charles I, the writings of Sir
Edward Coke (1552-1634), John Locke (1632-1704), The Spirit of Laws (1748) by
Charles De Montesquieu, and Sir William Blackstone (1723-1780);

(4) Teacher instruction
on The Northwest Ordinance, which sets the requirements for states to join the
union shall be required. Article 3 states: "Religion, morality, and
knowledge, being necessary to good government and the happiness of mankind,
schools and the means of education shall forever be encouraged...";

(5) Teaching the heritage
and meaning of the religious freedom statement of Article I, section 10 of the
Washington state Constitution. Suggested student readings include: Thomas
Jefferson's "Virginia Statute for Religious Freedom (1786), and James
Madison's "Memorial and Remonstrance." The purpose of this
instruction is to illustrate the struggle for obtaining "absolute freedom
of conscience in all matters of religious sentiment, ..." as stated in
Article I, section 10 of the Washington state Constitution;

(6) Requiring that
students be encouraged to memorize the preamble of the United States
Constitution along with the preamble and Article I, section 1 of the Washington
state Constitution;

(7) Students shall read
and be taught George Washington's First Inaugural Address and his Farewell
Address;

(8) Testing, including
state standardized testing, on the meanings of the constitutions and on the
meaning of such words as: Endowed, unalienable, created equal, tranquility,
posterity, ordain, blessings, and licentiousness;

(9) Displaying the
preamble and the first twelve sections of the Washington state Constitution in
each classroom with a note stating: "For the complete text of the
Washington state Constitution go to the school library"; and

(10) Illustrating, with
teacher instruction, the relationship between the "Pledge of Allegiance to
the United States" and the Washington state Constitution (the preamble,
Article I, section 1, and Article I, section 10). This instruction shall be
taught at the time the "Pledge of Allegiance" is taught.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 5. Part headings used in
this act are not any part of the law.

---
END ---