BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF
WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1. RCW 2.08.030 and 1971
ex.s. c 60 s 1 are each amended to read as follows:

The superior courts are
courts of record, and shall be always open, except on nonjudicial days. They
shall hold their sessions at the county seats of the several counties,
respectively, and at such other places within the county as are designated by
the judge or judges thereof with the approval of the chief justice of the
supreme court of this state and of the governing body of the county. They
shall hold regular and special sessions in the several counties of this state
at such times as may be prescribed by the judge or judges thereof.

For the purposes of
this section, "nonjudicial days" includes, for the superior court of
a particular county, any paid holiday established by ordinance or resolution of
the county legislative authority that is applicable to a majority of that
county's employees.

Sec. 2. RCW 3.30.040 and 1984 c
258 s 5 are each amended to read as follows:

The district courts
shall be open except on nonjudicial days. Sessions of the court shall be held
at such places as shall be provided by the district court districting plan.
The court shall sit as often as business requires in each city of the district
which provides suitable courtroom facilities, to hear causes in which such city
is the plaintiff.

For the purposes of
this section, "nonjudicial days" includes, for the district court of
a particular county, any paid holiday established by ordinance or resolution of
the county legislative authority that is applicable to a majority of that
county's employees.

Sec. 3. RCW 3.50.110 and 1984 c
258 s 114 are each amended to read as follows:

The municipal court
shall be open and shall hold such regular and special sessions as may be
prescribed by the legislative body of the city or town: PROVIDED, That the
municipal court shall not be open on nonjudicial days.

For the purposes of
this section, "nonjudicial days" includes, for the municipal court of
a particular city or town, any paid holiday established by ordinance of the
city or town legislative authority that is applicable to a majority of that
city's or town's employees.

Sec. 4. RCW 35.20.020 and 1965 c
7 s 35.20.020 are each amended to read as follows:

The municipal court
shall be always open except on nonjudicial days. It shall hold regular and
special sessions at such times as may be prescribed by the judges thereof. The
judges shall have the power to act as magistrates in accordance with the
provisions of chapter 10.16 RCW. The legislative body of the city may by
ordinance authorize a department of the municipal court to act as a night
court, and shall appropriate the necessary funds therefor.

For the
purposes of this section, "nonjudicial days" includes any paid
holiday established by ordinance of the legislative body of the city that is
applicable to a majority of the city's employees.

---
END ---