BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF
WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1. RCW 79.01.009 and 1992 c
167 s 2 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) For the purposes of
this section, "public agency" means any agency, political
subdivision, or unit of local government of this state including, but not
limited to, municipal corporations, quasi-municipal corporations, special
purpose districts, and local service districts; any agency of the state
government; any agency of the United States; and any Indian tribe recognized as
such by the federal government.

(2) With the approval
of the board of natural resources, the department of natural resources may
directly transfer or dispose of real property, without public auction, in the
following circumstances:

(a) Transfers in lieu
of condemnations;

(b) Transfers to public
agencies; and

(c) Transfers to
resolve trespass and property ownership disputes.

(3) Real property to be
transferred or disposed of under this section shall be transferred or disposed
of only after appraisal and for at least fair market value, and only if such
transaction is in the best interest of the state or affected trust.

(4)
Prior to transferring real property under subsection (2)(b) of this section,
the department must hold a public hearing in the manner provided for exchanges
under RCW 79.08.015, except in cases where the legislature has directed the
transfer.

--- END ---