BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF
WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec.
1. The legislature finds
that there has been an increase in the number of derelict and abandoned vessels
that are either grounded or anchored upon publicly or privately owned submerged
lands. These vessels are public nuisances and safety hazards as they often
pose hazards to navigation, detract from the aesthetics of Washington's
waterways, and threaten the environment with the potential release of hazardous
materials. The legislature further finds that the costs associated with the
disposal of derelict and abandoned vessels are substantial, and that in many
cases there is no way to track down the current vessel owners in order to seek
compensation. As a result, the costs associated with the removal of derelict
vessels becomes a burden on public entities and the taxpaying public.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
2. The definitions in this
section apply throughout this chapter unless the context clearly requires
otherwise.

(1) "Abandoned
vessel" means the vessel's owner is not known or cannot be located, or if
the vessel's owner is known and located but is unwilling to take control of the
vessel, and the vessel has been left, moored, or anchored in the same area
without the express consent, or contrary to the rules, of the owner, manager, or
lessee of the aquatic lands below or on which the vessel is located for either
a period of more than thirty consecutive days or for more than a total of
ninety days in any three hundred sixty-five day period. For the purposes of
this subsection (1) only, "in the same area" means within a radius of
five miles of any location where the vessel was previously moored or anchored
on aquatic lands.

(2) "Aquatic
lands" means all tidelands, shorelands, harbor areas, and the beds of
navigable waters, including lands owned by the state and lands owned by other
public or private entities.

(3) "Authorized
public entity" includes any of the following: The department of natural
resources; the department of fish and wildlife; the parks and recreation
commission; a metropolitan park district; a port district; and any city, town,
or county with ownership, management, or jurisdiction over the aquatic lands
where an abandoned or derelict vessel is located.

(4)
"Department" means the department of natural resources.

(5) "Derelict
vessel" means the vessel's owner is known and can be located, and exerts
control of a vessel that:

(a) Has been moored,
anchored, or otherwise left in the waters of the state or on public property
contrary to RCW 79.01.760 or rules adopted by an authorized public entity;

(b) Has been left on
private property without authorization of the owner; or

(c) Has been left for a
period of seven consecutive days, and:

(i) Is sunk or in
danger of sinking;

(ii) Is obstructing a
waterway; or

(iii) Is endangering
life or property.

(6) "Owner"
means any natural person, firm, partnership, corporation, association,
government entity, or organization that has a lawful right to possession of a
vessel by purchase, exchange, gift, lease, inheritance, or legal action whether
or not the vessel is subject to a security interest.

(7) "Vessel"
has the same meaning as defined in RCW 53.08.310.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
3. This chapter is not
intended to limit or constrain the ability and authority of the authorized
public entities to enact and enforce ordinances or other regulations relating
to derelict and abandoned vessels, or to take any actions authorized by federal
or state law in responding to derelict or abandoned vessels. This chapter is
also not intended to be the sole remedy available to authorized public entities
against the owners of derelict and abandoned vessels.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
4. (1) An authorized public
entity has the authority, subject to the processes and limitations of this
chapter, to store, strip, use, auction, sell, salvage, scrap, or dispose of an
abandoned or derelict vessel existing on or above aquatic lands within the
jurisdiction of the authorized public entity. A vessel disposal must be done
in an environmentally sound manner and in accordance with all federal, state,
and local laws, including the state solid waste disposal provisions provided
for in chapter 70.95 RCW. Scuttling or sinking of a vessel is only permissible
after obtaining the express permission of the owner or owners of the aquatic
lands below where the scuttling or sinking would occur, and obtaining all
necessary state and federal permits or licenses.

(2) The primary
responsibility to remove a derelict or abandoned vessel belongs to the owner,
operator, or lessee of the moorage facility or the aquatic lands where the
vessel is located. If the authorized public entity with the primary
responsibility is unwilling or unable to exercise the authority granted by this
section, it may request the department to assume the authorized public entity's
authority for a particular vessel. The department may at its discretion assume
the authorized public entity's authority for a particular vessel after being
requested to do so.

(3) The authority
granted by this chapter is permissive, and no authorized public entity has a
duty to exercise the authority. No liability attaches to an authorized public
entity that chooses not to exercise this authority.

(4) The department may
adopt rules that are consistent with this chapter and necessary to administer
the authority granted by this section.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
5. (1) Prior to exercising
the authority granted in section 4 of this act, the authorized public entity
must first obtain custody of the vessel. To do so, the authorized public
entity must:

(a) Mail notice of its
intent to obtain custody, at least twenty days prior to taking custody, to the
last known address of the previous owner to register the vessel in any state or
with the federal government and to any lien holders or secured interests on
record. A notice need not be sent to the purported owner or any other person
whose interest in the vessel is not recorded with a state or federal agency;

(b) Post notice of its
intent clearly on the vessel for thirty days and publish its intent at least
once, more than ten days but less than twenty days prior to taking custody, in
a newspaper of general circulation for the county in which the vessel is
located; and

(c) Post notice of its
intent on the department's internet web site on a page specifically designated
for such notices. If the authorized public entity is not the department, the
department must facilitate the internet posting.

(2) All notices sent,
posted, or published in accordance with this section must, at a minimum,
explain the intent of the authorized public entity to take custody of the
vessel, the rights of the authorized public entity after taking custody of the
vessel as provided in section 4 of this act, the procedures the owner must
follow in order to avoid custody being taken by the authorized public entity,
the procedures the owner must follow in order to reclaim possession after
custody is taken by the authorized public entity, and the financial liabilities
that the owner may incur as provided for in section 7 of this act.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
6. (1) After taking custody
of a vessel, the authorized public entity may use or dispose of the vessel in
any appropriate and environmentally sound manner without further notice to any
owners, but must give preference to uses that derive some monetary benefit from
the vessel, either in whole or in scrap. If no value can be derived from the
vessel, the authorized public entity must give preference to the least costly,
environmentally sound, reasonable disposal option. Any disposal operations
must be consistent with the state solid waste disposal provisions provided for
in chapter 70.95 RCW.

(2) If the authorized
public entity chooses to offer the vessel at a public auction, either a minimum
bid may be set or a letter of credit may be required, or both, to discourage
future reabandonment of the vessel.

(3) Proceeds derived
from the sale of the vessel must first be applied to any administrative costs
that are incurred by the authorized public entity during the notification
procedures set forth in section 5 of this act, removal and disposal costs, and
costs associated with environmental damages directly or indirectly caused by
the vessel. If the proceeds derived from the vessel exceed all administrative
costs, removal and disposal costs, and costs associated with environmental damages
directly or indirectly caused by the vessel, the remaining moneys must be
applied to satisfying any liens registered against the vessel.

(4) Any value derived
from a vessel greater than all liens and costs incurred reverts to the derelict
vessel removal account established in section 11 of this act.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
7. (1) The owner of an
abandoned or derelict vessel is responsible for reimbursing an authorized
public entity for all reasonable and auditable costs associated with the
removal or disposal of the owner's vessel under this chapter. These costs
include, but are not limited to, costs incurred exercising the authority
granted in section 4 of this act, all administrative costs incurred by the
authorized public entity during the procedure set forth in section 5 of this
act, removal and disposal costs, and costs associated with environmental
damages directly or indirectly caused by the vessel.

(2) Reimbursement for
cost and collections of the fine may be sought from an owner who is identified
subsequent to the vessel's removal and disposal.

(3) If the full amount
of all costs due to the authorized public entity under this chapter is not paid
to the authorized public entity within thirty days after first notifying the
responsible parties of the amounts owed, the authorized public entity or the
department may bring an action in any court of competent jurisdiction to
recover the costs, plus reasonable attorneys' fees and costs incurred by the
authorized public entity.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
8. An authorized public
entity may enter into a contract with a private company or individual to carry
out the authority granted in this chapter.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
9. The rights granted by
this chapter are in addition to any other legal rights an authorized public
entity may have to obtain title to, remove, recover, sell, or dispose of an
abandoned or derelict vessel, and in no way does this chapter alter those
rights, or affect the priority of other liens on a vessel.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
10. A person seeking to
redeem a vessel that is in the custody of an authorized public entity may
commence a lawsuit to contest the authorized public entity's decision to take
custody of the vessel or to contest the amount of reimbursement owed. The
lawsuit must be commenced in the superior court of the county in which the
vessel existed when custody was taken by the authorized public entity. The
lawsuit must be commenced within twenty days of the date the authorized public
entity took custody of the vessel under section 5 of this act, or the right to
a hearing is deemed waived and the vessel's owner is liable for any costs owed
the authorized public entity. In the event of litigation, the prevailing party
is entitled to reasonable attorneys' fees and costs.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
11. (1) The derelict vessel
removal account is created in the state treasury. All receipts from sections 6
and 7 of this act and those moneys specified in RCW 88.02.030 and 88.02.050
must be deposited into the account. Moneys in the account may only be spent
after appropriation. Expenditures from the account shall be used by the
department to reimburse authorized public entities for seventy-five percent of
the total reasonable and auditable administrative, removal, disposal, and
environmental damage costs of abandoned or derelict vessels when the previous
owner is either unknown after a reasonable search effort or insolvent.

(2) If the balance of
the account reaches one million dollars as of June 30th of any year, the
collection of any fees associated with this account must be suspended for the
following fiscal year.

(3) Priority for use of
this account is for the removal of derelict and abandoned vessels that are in
danger of sinking, breaking up, or blocking navigation channels, or that
present environmental risks such as leaking fuel or other hazardous substances.
The department must develop criteria, in the form of informal guidelines, to
prioritize removal projects associated with this chapter, but may not consider
whether the applicant is a state or local entity when prioritizing. The
guidelines must also include guidance to the authorized public entities as to
what removal activities and associated costs are reasonable and eligible for
reimbursement.

(4) The department must
keep all authorized public entities apprized of the balance of the derelict
vessel removal account and the funds available for reimbursement. The
guidelines developed by the department must also be made available to the other
authorized public entities. This subsection (4) must be satisfied by utilizing
the least costly method, including maintaining the information on the
department's internet web site, or any other cost-effective method.

(5) An authorized
public entity may contribute its twenty-five percent of costs that are not
eligible for reimbursement by using in-kind services, including the use of
existing staff, equipment, and volunteers.

(6) This chapter does
not guarantee reimbursement for an authorized public entity. Authorized public
entities seeking certainty in reimbursement prior to taking action under this
chapter may first notify the department of their proposed action and the
estimated total costs. Upon notification by an authorized public entity, the
department must make the authorized public entity aware of the status of the
fund and the likelihood of reimbursement being available. The department may
offer technical assistance and assure reimbursement for up to two years
following the removal action if an assurance is appropriate given the balance
of the fund and the details of the proposed action.

Sec. 12. RCW 88.02.030 and 1998 c
198 s 1 are each amended to read as follows:

Vessel registration is
required under this chapter except for the following:

(1) Military or public
vessels of the United States, except recreational-type public vessels;

(2) Vessels owned by a
state or subdivision thereof, used principally for governmental purposes and
clearly identifiable as such;

(3) Vessels either (a)
registered or numbered under the laws of a country other than the United
States; or (b) having a valid United States customs service cruising license
issued pursuant to 19 C.F.R. Sec. 4.94. On or before the sixty-first day of
use in the state, any vessel in the state under this subsection shall obtain an
identification document from the department of licensing, its agents, or
subagents indicating when the vessel first came into the state. At the time of
any issuance of an identification document, a ((twenty-five)) thirty
dollar identification document fee shall be paid by the vessel owner to the
department of licensing for the cost of providing the identification document
by the department of licensing. Five dollars from each such transaction
must be deposited in the derelict vessel removal account created in section 11
of this act. Any moneys remaining from the fee after the payment of
costs and the deposit to the derelict vessel removal account shall be
allocated to counties by the state treasurer for approved boating safety
programs under RCW 88.02.045. The department of licensing shall adopt rules to
implement its duties under this subsection, including issuing and displaying
the identification document and collecting the ((twenty-five)) thirty
dollar fee;

(4) Vessels that have
been issued a valid number under federal law or by an approved issuing
authority of the state of principal operation. However, a vessel that is
validly registered in another state but that is removed to this state for
principal use is subject to registration under this chapter. The issuing
authority for this state shall recognize the validity of the numbers previously
issued for a period of sixty days after arrival in this state;

(5) Vessels owned by a
nonresident if the vessel is located upon the waters of this state exclusively
for repairs, alteration, or reconstruction, or any testing related to the
repair, alteration, or reconstruction conducted in this state if an employee of
the repair, alteration, or construction facility is on board the vessel during
any testing((: PROVIDED, That)). However, any vessel owned by a
nonresident is located upon the waters of this state exclusively for repairs,
alteration, reconstruction, or testing for a period longer than sixty days,
that the nonresident shall file an affidavit with the department of revenue
verifying the vessel is located upon the waters of this state for repair,
alteration, reconstruction, or testing and shall continue to file such
affidavit every sixty days thereafter, while the vessel is located upon the
waters of this state exclusively for repairs, alteration, reconstruction, or
testing;

(6) Vessels equipped
with propulsion machinery of less than ten horsepower that:

(a) Are owned by the
owner of a vessel for which a valid vessel number has been issued;

(b) Display the number
of that numbered vessel followed by the suffix "1" in the manner
prescribed by the department; and

(c) Are used as a
tender for direct transportation between that vessel and the shore and for no
other purpose;

(7) Vessels under
sixteen feet in overall length which have no propulsion machinery of any type
or which are not used on waters subject to the jurisdiction of the United
States or on the high seas beyond the territorial seas for vessels owned in the
United States and are powered by propulsion machinery of ten or less
horsepower;

(8) Vessels with no
propulsion machinery of any type for which the primary mode of propulsion is
human power;

(9) Vessels primarily
engaged in commerce which have or are required to have a valid marine document
as a vessel of the United States. Commercial vessels which the department of
revenue determines have the external appearance of vessels which would
otherwise be required to register under this chapter, must display decals
issued annually by the department of revenue that indicate the vessel's exempt
status;

(10) Vessels primarily
engaged in commerce which are owned by a resident of a country other than the
United States; and

(11) On and after
January 1, 1998, vessels owned by a nonresident individual brought into the
state for his or her use or enjoyment while temporarily within the state for
not more than six months in any continuous twelve-month period, unless the
vessel is used in conducting a nontransitory business activity within the
state. However, the vessel must have been issued a valid number under federal
law or by an approved issuing authority of the state of principal operation.
On or before the sixty-first day of use in the state, any vessel temporarily in
the state under this subsection shall obtain an identification document from
the department of licensing, its agents, or subagents indicating when the
vessel first came into the state. An identification document shall be valid
for a period of two months. At the time of any issuance of an identification
document, a twenty-five dollar identification document fee shall be paid by the
vessel owner to the department of licensing for the cost of providing the
identification document by the department of licensing. Any moneys remaining
from the fee after payment of costs shall be allocated to counties by the state
treasurer for approved boating safety programs under RCW 88.02.045. The
department of licensing shall adopt rules to implement its duties under this subsection,
including issuing and displaying the identification document and collecting the
twenty-five dollar fee.

Sec. 13. RCW 88.02.050 and 1993 c
244 s 38 are each amended to read as follows:

Application for a
vessel registration shall be made to the department or its authorized agent in
the manner and upon forms prescribed by the department. The application shall
state the name and address of each owner of the vessel and such other
information as may be required by the department, shall be signed by at least
one owner, and shall be accompanied by a vessel registration fee of ten dollars
and fifty cents per year and the excise tax imposed under chapter 82.49 RCW. In
addition, two additional dollars must be collected annually from every vessel
registration application. These moneys must be deposited into the derelict
vessel removal account established in section 11 of this act. If the
department of natural resources indicates that the balance of the derelict
vessel removal account reaches one million dollars as of June 30th of any year,
the collection of the two-dollar fee must be suspended for the following fiscal
year. Any fees required for licensing agents under RCW 46.01.140 shall be
in addition to the ten dollar and fifty cent annual registration fee and the
two-dollar derelict vessel fee.

Upon receipt of the
application and the registration fee, the department shall assign a
registration number and issue a decal for each vessel. The registration number
and decal shall be issued and affixed to the vessel in a manner prescribed by
the department consistent with the standard numbering system for vessels set
forth in volume 33, part 174, of the code of federal regulations. A valid
decal affixed as prescribed shall indicate compliance with the annual
registration requirements of this chapter.

The vessel
registrations and decals are valid for a period of one year, except that the
director of licensing may extend or diminish vessel registration periods, and
the decals therefor, for the purpose of staggered renewal periods. For
registration periods of more or less than one year, the department may collect
prorated annual registration fees and excise taxes based upon the number of
months in the registration period. Vessel registrations are renewable every
year in a manner prescribed by the department upon payment of the vessel
registration fee ((and)), excise tax, and the derelict vessel
fee. Upon renewing a vessel registration, the department shall issue a new
decal to be affixed as prescribed by the department.

When the department
issues either a notice to renew a vessel registration or a decal for a new or
renewed vessel registration, it shall also provide information on the location
of marine oil recycling tanks and sewage holding tank pumping stations. This
information will be provided to the department by the state parks and
recreation commission in a form ready for distribution. The form will be
developed and prepared by the state parks and recreation commission with the
cooperation of the department of ecology. The department, the state parks and
recreation commission, and the department of ecology shall enter into a
memorandum of agreement to implement this process.

A person acquiring a
vessel from a dealer or a vessel already validly registered under this chapter
shall, within fifteen days of the acquisition or purchase of the vessel, apply
to the department or its authorized agent for transfer of the vessel
registration, and the application shall be accompanied by a transfer fee of one
dollar.

Sec. 14. RCW 88.02.040 and 1989 c
393 s 12 are each amended to read as follows:

The department shall
provide for the issuance of vessel registrations and may appoint agents for
collecting fees and issuing registration numbers and decals. General fees
for vessel registrations collected by the director shall be deposited in the
general fund: PROVIDED, That any amount above one million one hundred thousand
dollars per fiscal year shall be allocated to counties by the state treasurer
for boating safety/education and law enforcement programs and the fee
collected specifically for the removal and disposal of derelict vessels must be
deposited in the derelict vessel removal account created in section 11 of this
act. Eligibility for ((such)) boating safety/education and law
enforcement program allocations shall be contingent upon approval of
the local boating safety program by the state parks and recreation commission.
Fund allocation shall be based on the numbers of registered vessels by county
of moorage. Each benefitting county shall be responsible for equitable
distribution of such allocation to other jurisdictions with approved boating
safety programs within said county. Any fees not allocated to counties due to
the absence of an approved boating safety program, shall be allocated to the
commission for awards to local governments to offset law enforcement and
boating safety impacts of boaters recreating in jurisdictions other than where
registered.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
15. A new section is added
to chapter 35.21 RCW to read as follows:

Any city or town has
the authority, subject to the processes and limitation outlined in chapter
79.-- RCW (sections 1 through 11 of this act), to store, strip, use, auction,
sell, salvage, scrap, or dispose of an abandoned or derelict vessel existing on
or above publicly or privately owned aquatic lands within the jurisdiction of
the city or town.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
16. A new section is added
to chapter 35A.21 RCW to read as follows:

A code city has the
authority, subject to the processes and limitation outlined in chapter 79.--
RCW (sections 1 through 11 of this act), to store, strip, use, auction, sell,
salvage, scrap, or dispose of an abandoned or derelict vessel existing on or
above publicly or privately owned aquatic lands within the jurisdiction of the
code city.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
17. A new section is added
to chapter 36.32 RCW to read as follows:

A county has the
authority, subject to the processes and limitation outlined in chapter 79.--
RCW (sections 1 through 11 of this act), to store, strip, use, auction, sell,
salvage, scrap, or dispose of an abandoned or derelict vessel existing on or
above publicly or privately owned aquatic lands within the jurisdiction of the
county.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
18. A new section is added
to chapter 53.08 RCW to read as follows:

A port district has the
authority, subject to the processes and limitation outlined in chapter 79.--
RCW (sections 1 through 11 of this act), to store, strip, use, auction, sell,
salvage, scrap, or dispose of an abandoned or derelict vessel existing on or
above publicly or privately owned aquatic lands within the jurisdiction of the
port district.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
19. A new section is added
to chapter 77.12 RCW to read as follows:

The director has the
authority, subject to the processes and limitation outlined in chapter 79.--
RCW (sections 1 through 11 of this act), to store, strip, use, auction, sell,
salvage, scrap, or dispose of an abandoned or derelict vessel existing on or
above publicly or privately owned aquatic lands within the jurisdiction of the
department.

Sec. 20. RCW 79A.65.010 and 2000
c 11 s 115 are each amended to read as follows:

Unless the context
clearly requires otherwise, the definitions in this section apply throughout
this chapter.

(1) "Charges"
means charges of the commission for moorage and storage, and all other charges
related to the vessel and owing to or that become owing to the commission,
including but not limited to costs of securing, disposing, or removing vessels,
damages to any commission facility, and any costs of sale and related legal
expenses for implementing RCW 79A.65.020 and 79A.65.030.

(2)
"Commission" means the Washington state parks and recreation
commission.

(3) "Commission
facility" means any ((property or)) moorage facility, as
that term is defined in RCW 53.08.310, owned, leased, operated, managed, or
otherwise controlled by the commission or by a person pursuant to a contract
with the commission.

(4) "Owner"
means a person who has a lawful right to possession of a vessel by purchase,
exchange, gift, lease, inheritance, or legal action whether or not the vessel
is subject to a security interest, and shall not include the holder of a bona
fide security interest.

(5) "Person"
means any natural person, firm, partnership, corporation, association,
organization, or any other entity.

(6)(a) "Registered
owner" means any person that is either: (i) Shown as the owner in a
vessel certificate of documentation issued by the secretary of the United
States department of transportation under 46 U.S.C. Sec. 12103; or (ii) the registered
owner or legal owner of a vessel for which a certificate of title has been
issued under chapter 88.02 RCW; or (iii) the owner of a vessel registered under
the vessel registration laws of another state under which laws the commission
can readily identify the ownership of vessels registered with that state.

(b) "Registered
owner" also includes: (i) Any holder of a security interest or lien
recorded with the United States department of transportation with respect to a
vessel on which a certificate of documentation has been issued; (ii) any holder
of a security interest identified in a certificate of title for a vessel
registered under chapter 88.02 RCW; or (iii) any holder of a security interest
in a vessel where the holder is identified in vessel registration information
of a state with vessel registration laws that fall within (a)(iii) of this
subsection and under which laws the commission can readily determine the
identity of the holder.

(c) "Registered
owner" does not include any vessel owner or holder of a lien or security
interest in a vessel if the vessel does not have visible information affixed to
it (such as name and hailing port or registration numbers) that will enable the
commission to obtain ownership information for the vessel without incurring
unreasonable expense.

(7) "Registered
vessel" means a vessel having a registered owner.

(8) "Secured
vessel" means any vessel that has been secured by the commission that
remains in the commission's possession and control.

(9) "Unauthorized
vessel" means a vessel using a commission facility of any type whose owner
has not paid the required moorage fees or has left the vessel beyond the posted
time limits, or a vessel otherwise present without permission of the
commission.

(10) "Vessel"
means every watercraft or part thereof constructed, used, or capable of being
used as a means of transportation on the water. It includes any equipment or
personal property on the vessel that is used or capable of being used for the
operation, navigation, or maintenance of the vessel.

Sec. 21. RCW 79A.65.020 and 1994
c 51 s 2 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) The commission may
take reasonable measures, including but not limited to the use of anchors,
chains, ropes, and locks, or removal from the water, to secure unauthorized
vessels located at or on a commission facility so that the unauthorized vessels
are in the possession and control of the commission. At least ten days before
securing any unauthorized registered vessel, the commission shall send
notification by registered mail to the last registered owner or registered
owners of the vessel at their last known address or addresses.

(2) The commission may
take reasonable measures, including but not limited to the use of anchors,
chains, ropes, locks, or removal from the water, to secure any vessel if the
vessel, in the opinion of the commission, is a nuisance, is in danger of
sinking or creating other damage to a commission facility, or is otherwise a
threat to the health, safety, or welfare of the public or environment at a
commission facility. The costs of any such procedure shall be paid by the
vessel's owner.

(3) At the time of
securing any vessel under subsection (1) or (2) of this section, the commission
shall attach to the vessel a readily visible notice or, when practicable, shall
post such notice in a conspicuous location at the commission facility in the
event the vessel is removed from the premises. The notice shall be of a
reasonable size and shall contain the following information:

(a) The date and time
the notice was attached or posted;

(b) A statement that
the vessel has been secured by the commission and that if the commission's
charges, if any, are not paid and the vessel is not removed by
. . . . . . (the thirty-fifth consecutive day
following the date of attachment or posting of the notice), the vessel will be
considered abandoned and will be sold at public auction to satisfy the charges;

(c) The address and
telephone number where additional information may be obtained concerning the
securing of the vessel and conditions for its release; and

(d) A description of
the owner's or secured party's rights under this chapter.

(4) With respect to
registered vessels: Within five days of the date that notice is attached or
posted under subsection (3) of this section, the commission shall send such
notice, by registered mail, to each registered owner.

(5) If a vessel is
secured under subsection (1) or (2) of this section, the owner, or any person
with a legal right to possess the vessel, may claim the vessel by:

(a) Making arrangements
satisfactory to the commission for the immediate removal of the vessel from the
commission's control or for authorized storage or moorage; and

(b) Making payment to
the commission of all reasonable charges incurred by the commission in securing
the vessel under subsections (1) and (2) of this section and of all moorage
fees owed to the commission.

(6) A vessel is
considered abandoned if, within the thirty-five day period following the date
of attachment or posting of notice in subsection (3) of this section, the
vessel has not been claimed under subsection (5) of this section.

(7) If the owner or
owners of a vessel are unable to reimburse the commission for all reasonable
charges under subsections (1) and (2) of this section within a reasonable time,
the commission may seek reimbursement of seventy-five percent of all reasonable
and auditable costs from the derelict vessel removal account established in
section 11 of this act.

Sec. 22. RCW 79A.65.030 and 2000
c 11 s 116 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) The commission may
provide for the public sale of vessels considered abandoned under RCW
79A.65.020. At such sales, the vessels shall be sold for cash to the highest
and best bidder. The commission may establish either a minimum bid or
require a letter of credit, or both, to discourage the future reabandonment of
the vessel.

(2) Before a vessel is
sold, the commission shall make a reasonable effort to provide notice of sale,
at least twenty days before the day of the sale, to each registered owner of a
registered vessel and each owner of an unregistered vessel. The notice shall
contain the time and place of the sale, a reasonable description of the vessel
to be sold, and the amount of charges then owing with respect to the vessel,
and a summary of the rights and procedures under this chapter. A notice of
sale shall be published at least once, more than ten but not more than twenty
days before the sale, in a newspaper of general circulation in the county in
which the commission facility is located. This notice shall include: (a) If
known, the name of the vessel and the last owner and the owner's address; and
(b) a reasonable description of the vessel. The commission may bid all or part
of its charges at the sale and may become a purchaser at the sale.

(3) Before a vessel is
sold, any person seeking to redeem a secured vessel may commence a lawsuit in
the superior court for the county in which the vessel was secured to contest
the commission's decision to secure the vessel or the amount of charges owing.
This lawsuit shall be commenced within fifteen days of the date the
notification was posted under RCW 79A.65.020(3), or the right to a hearing is
deemed waived and the owner is liable for any charges owing the commission. In
the event of litigation, the prevailing party is entitled to reasonable
attorneys' fees and costs.

(4) The proceeds of a
sale under this section shall be applied first to the payment of the amount of
the reasonable charges incurred by the commission and moorage fees owed to the
commission, then to the owner or to satisfy any liens of record or security
interests of record on the vessel in the order of their priority. If an owner
cannot in the exercise of due diligence be located by the commission within one
year of the date of the sale, any excess funds from the sale, following the
satisfaction of any bona fide security interest, shall revert to the ((department
of revenue under chapter 63.29 RCW)) derelict vessel removal account
established in section 11 of this act. If the sale is for a sum less than
the applicable charges, the commission is entitled to assert a claim for the
deficiency against the vessel owner. Nothing in this section prevents any lien
holder or secured party from asserting a claim for any deficiency owed the lien
holder or secured party.

(5) If no one purchases
the vessel at a sale, the commission may proceed to properly dispose of the
vessel in any way the commission considers appropriate, including, but not
limited to, destruction of the vessel or by negotiated sale. The commission
may assert a claim against the owner for any charges incurred thereby. If the
vessel, or any part of the vessel, or any rights to the vessel, are sold under
this subsection, any proceeds from the sale shall be distributed in the manner
provided in subsection (4) of this section.

Sec. 23. RCW 53.08.320 and 1986 c
260 s 2 are each amended to read as follows:

A moorage facility
operator may adopt all ((regulations)) rules necessary for rental
and use of moorage facilities and for the expeditious collection of port
charges. The ((regulations)) rules may also establish procedures
for the enforcement of these ((regulations)) rules by port
district, city, county, metropolitan park district or town personnel. The ((regulations))
rules shall include the following:

(1) Procedures
authorizing moorage facility personnel to take reasonable measures, including
the use of chains, ropes, and locks, or removal from the water, to secure
vessels within the moorage facility so that the vessels are in the possession
and control of the moorage facility operator and cannot be removed from the
moorage facility. These procedures may be used if an owner mooring or storing
a vessel at the moorage facility fails, after being notified that charges are owing
and of the owner's right to commence legal proceedings to contest that such
charges are owing, to pay the port charges owed or to commence legal
proceedings. Notification shall be by registered mail to the owner at his or
her last known address. In the case of a transient vessel, or where no
address was furnished by the owner, the moorage facility operator need not give
such notice prior to securing the vessel. At the time of securing the vessel,
an authorized moorage facility employee shall attach to the vessel a readily
visible notice. The notice shall be of a reasonable size and shall contain the
following information:

(a) The date and time
the notice was attached;

(b) A statement that if
the account is not paid in full within ninety days from the time the notice is
attached, the vessel may be sold at public auction to satisfy the port charges;
and

(c) The address and
telephone number where additional information may be obtained concerning
release of the vessel.

After a vessel is
secured, the operator shall make a reasonable effort to notify the owner by
registered mail in order to give the owner the information contained in the
notice.

(2) Procedures
authorizing moorage facility personnel at their discretion to move moored
vessels ashore for storage within properties under the operator's control or
for storage with private persons under their control as bailees of the moorage
facility, if the vessel is, in the opinion of port personnel a nuisance, if the
vessel is in danger of sinking or creating other damage, or is owing port
charges. Costs of any such procedure shall be paid by the vessel's owner. If
the owner is not known, or unable to reimburse the moorage facility operator
for the costs of these procedures, the mooring facility operators may seek
reimbursement of seventy-five percent of all reasonable and auditable costs
from the derelict vessel removal account established in section 11 of this act.

(3) If a vessel is
secured under subsection (1) of this section or moved ashore under subsection
(2) of this section, the owner who is obligated to the moorage facility
operator for port charges may regain possession of the vessel by:

(a) Making arrangements
satisfactory with the moorage facility operator for the immediate removal of
the vessel from the moorage facility or for authorized moorage; and

(b) Making payment to
the moorage facility operator of all port charges, or by posting with the
moorage facility operator a sufficient cash bond or other acceptable security,
to be held in trust by the moorage facility operator pending written agreement
of the parties with respect to payment by the vessel owner of the amount owing,
or pending resolution of the matter of the charges in a civil action in a court
of competent jurisdiction. After entry of judgment, including any appeals, in
a court of competent jurisdiction, or after the parties reach agreement with
respect to payment, the trust shall terminate and the moorage facility operator
shall receive so much of the bond or other security as is agreed, or as is
necessary to satisfy any judgment, costs, and interest as may be awarded to the
moorage facility operator. The balance shall be refunded immediately to the
owner at his or her last known address.

(4) If a vessel has
been secured by the moorage facility operator under subsection (1) of this
section and is not released to the owner under the bonding provisions of this
section within ninety days after notifying or attempting to notify the owner
under subsection (1) of this section, the vessel shall be conclusively presumed
to have been abandoned by the owner.

(5) If a vessel moored
or stored at a moorage facility is abandoned, the moorage facility operator
may, by resolution of its legislative authority, authorize the public sale of
the vessel by authorized personnel to the highest and best bidder for cash as
((follows:)) prescribed by this subsection (5). Either a minimum bid
may be established or a letter of credit may be required, or both, to
discourage the future reabandonment of the vessel.

(a) Before the vessel
is sold, the owner of the vessel shall be given at least twenty days' notice of
the sale in the manner set forth in subsection (1) of this section if the name
and address of the owner is known. The notice shall contain the time and place
of the sale, a reasonable description of the vessel to be sold, and the amount
of port charges owed with respect to the vessel. The notice of sale shall be
published at least once, more than ten but not more than twenty days before the
sale, in a newspaper of general circulation in the county in which the moorage
facility is located. Such notice shall include the name of the vessel, if any,
the last known owner and address, and a reasonable description of the vessel to
be sold. The moorage facility operator may bid all or part of its port charges
at the sale and may become a purchaser at the sale((;)).

(b) Before the vessel
is sold, any person seeking to redeem an impounded vessel under this section
may commence a lawsuit in the superior court for the county in which the vessel
was impounded to contest the validity of the impoundment or the amount of the
port charges owing. Such lawsuit must be commenced within ten days of the date
the notification was provided pursuant to subsection (1) of this section, or
the right to a hearing shall be deemed waived and the owner shall be liable for
any port charges owing the moorage facility operator. In the event of
litigation, the prevailing party shall be entitled to reasonable attorneys'
fees and costs.

(c) The proceeds of a
sale under this section shall first be applied to the payment of port
charges. The balance, if any, shall be paid to the owner. If the owner cannot
in the exercise of due diligence be located by the moorage facility operator
within one year of the date of the sale, the excess funds from the sale shall
revert to the ((department of revenue pursuant to chapter 63.29 RCW)) derelict
vessel removal account established in section 11 of this act. If the sale
is for a sum less than the applicable port charges, the moorage facility
operator is entitled to assert a claim for a deficiency.

(d) In the event no one
purchases the vessel at a sale, or a vessel is not removed from the premises or
other arrangements are not made within ten days of sale, title to the vessel
will revert to the moorage facility operator.

(6) The ((regulations))
rules authorized under this section shall be enforceable only if the
moorage facility has had its tariff containing such ((regulations)) rules
conspicuously posted at its moorage facility at all times.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
24. Sections 1 through 11 of
this act constitute a new chapter in Title 79 RCW.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
25. If any provision of this
act or its application to any person or circumstance is held invalid, the
remainder of the act or the application of the provision to other persons or
circumstances is not affected.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 26. This act takes effect
January 1, 2003.

---
END ---