BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF
WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec.
1. A new section is added
to chapter 10.105 RCW to read as follows:

(1) No judgment of
forfeiture of property in a civil forfeiture proceeding by the state or any of
its political subdivisions shall be allowed or entered until and unless the
owner of the property is convicted of a crime in Washington or another
jurisdiction and the property is found by clear and convincing evidence to have
been instrumental in committing or facilitating the crime or to be proceeds of
that crime. The value of the property forfeited under the provisions of this
subsection shall be substantially proportional to the specific conduct for
which the owner of the property has been convicted. For purposes of this
section, "property" means any interest in anything of value,
including the whole of any lot or tract of land and tangible and intangible
personal property, including currency, instruments or securities or any other
kind of privilege, interest, claim, or right whether due or to become due. Nothing
in this section prohibits a person from voluntarily giving a judgment of
forfeiture.

(2) In a civil
forfeiture proceeding if a financial institution claiming an interest in the
property demonstrates that it holds an interest, its interest shall not be subject
to forfeiture. In a civil forfeiture proceeding if a person claiming an
interest in the property, other than a financial institution or a defendant who
has been charged with or convicted of a crime involving that property,
demonstrates that the person has an interest in the property, that person's
interest shall not be subject to forfeiture unless:

(a) The forfeiting
agency proves by clear and convincing evidence that the person took the
property or the interest with the intent to defeat the forfeiture; or

(b) A conviction under
subsection (1) of this section is later obtained against the person.

(3) Notwithstanding the
provisions of subsection (1) of this section, if, following notice to all
persons known to have an interest or who may have an interest, no person claims
an interest in the seized property or if the property is contraband, a judgment
of forfeiture may be allowed and entered without a criminal conviction. For
purposes of this subsection, "contraband" means personal property,
articles, or things, including but not limited to controlled substances or drug
paraphernalia, that a person is prohibited by Washington statute or local
ordinance from producing, obtaining, or possessing.

(4) Nothing in this
section shall be construed to affect the temporary seizure of property for
evidentiary, forfeiture, or protective purposes, or to alter the power of the
governor to remit fines or forfeitures under Article III, section 11 of the
Washington Constitution.

(5) Any sale of
forfeited property shall be conducted in a commercially reasonable manner.
Property or proceeds forfeited under subsection (1), (3), or (6) of this
section shall be distributed or applied in the following order:

(a) To the satisfaction
of any foreclosed liens, security interests, and contracts in the order of
their priority;

(b) To the state or any
of its political subdivisions for actual and reasonable expenses related to the
costs of the forfeiture proceeding, including attorney fees, storage,
maintenance, management, and disposition of the property incurred in connection
with the sale of any forfeited property in an amount not to exceed twenty-five
percent of the total proceeds in any single forfeiture;

(c) To the state or any
of its political subdivisions to be used exclusively for drug treatment, unless
another disposition is specially provided by law.

(6) The state of
Washington or any of its political subdivisions shall take all necessary steps
to obtain shared property or proceeds from the United States department of
justice resulting from a forfeiture. Any property or proceeds received from
the United States department of justice by the state of Washington or any of
its political subdivisions shall be applied as provided in subsection (5) of
this section.

(7) Neither the state
of Washington, its political subdivisions, nor any forfeiting agency shall
transfer forfeiture proceedings to the federal government unless a state court
has affirmatively found that:

(a) The activity giving
rise to the forfeiture is interstate in nature and sufficiently complex to
justify the transfer;

(b) The seized property
may only be forfeited under federal law; or

(c) Pursuing forfeiture
under state law would unduly burden the state forfeiting agencies.

(8) All forfeiting
agencies shall report the nature and disposition of all property and proceeds
seized for forfeiture or forfeited to the asset forfeiture oversight committee,
hereby created. The members of the committee shall be appointed by the
governor. The committee shall be operated independent of any forfeiting
agency. The committee shall generate and make available to the public an
annual report of the information collected. The committee shall also make
recommendations to ensure that asset forfeiture proceedings are handled in a
manner that is fair to innocent property owners and interest holders.

Sec. 2. RCW 69.50.505 and 2001 c
168 s 1 are each amended to read as follows:

(a) The following are
subject to seizure and forfeiture and no property right exists in them:

(1) All controlled
substances which have been manufactured, distributed, dispensed, acquired, or
possessed in violation of this chapter or chapter 69.41 or 69.52 RCW, and all
hazardous chemicals, as defined in RCW 64.44.010, used or intended to be used
in the manufacture of controlled substances;

(2) All raw materials,
products, and equipment of any kind which are used, or intended for use, in
manufacturing, compounding, processing, delivering, importing, or exporting any
controlled substance in violation of this chapter or chapter 69.41 or 69.52
RCW;

(3) All property which
is used, or intended for use, as a container for property described in
paragraphs (1) or (2);

(4) All conveyances,
including aircraft, vehicles, or vessels, which are used, or intended for use,
in any manner to facilitate the sale, delivery, or receipt of property
described in paragraphs (1) or (2), except that:

(i) No conveyance used
by any person as a common carrier in the transaction of business as a common
carrier is subject to forfeiture under this section unless it appears that the
owner or other person in charge of the conveyance is a consenting party or
privy to a violation of this chapter or chapter 69.41 or 69.52 RCW;

(ii) No conveyance is
subject to forfeiture under this section by reason of any act or omission
established by the owner thereof to have been committed or omitted without the
owner's knowledge or consent;

(iii) No conveyance is
subject to forfeiture under this section if used in the receipt of only an
amount of marijuana for which possession constitutes a misdemeanor under RCW
69.50.401(e);

(iv) A forfeiture of a
conveyance encumbered by a bona fide security interest is subject to the
interest of the secured party if the secured party neither had knowledge of nor
consented to the act or omission; and

(v) When the owner of a
conveyance has been arrested under this chapter or chapter 69.41 or 69.52 RCW
the conveyance in which the person is arrested may not be subject to forfeiture
unless it is seized or process is issued for its seizure within ten days of the
owner's arrest;

(5) All books, records,
and research products and materials, including formulas, microfilm, tapes, and
data which are used, or intended for use, in violation of this chapter or
chapter 69.41 or 69.52 RCW;

(6) All drug
paraphernalia;

(7) All moneys,
negotiable instruments, securities, or other tangible or intangible property of
value furnished or intended to be furnished by any person in exchange for a
controlled substance in violation of this chapter or chapter 69.41 or 69.52
RCW, all tangible or intangible personal property, proceeds, or assets acquired
in whole or in part with proceeds traceable to an exchange or series of
exchanges in violation of this chapter or chapter 69.41 or 69.52 RCW, and all
moneys, negotiable instruments, and securities used or intended to be used to
facilitate any violation of this chapter or chapter 69.41 or 69.52 RCW. A
forfeiture of money, negotiable instruments, securities, or other tangible or
intangible property encumbered by a bona fide security interest is subject to
the interest of the secured party if, at the time the security interest was
created, the secured party neither had knowledge of nor consented to the act or
omission. No personal property may be forfeited under this paragraph, to the
extent of the interest of an owner, by reason of any act or omission which that
owner establishes was committed or omitted without the owner's knowledge or
consent; and

(8) All real property,
including any right, title, and interest in the whole of any lot or tract of
land, and any appurtenances or improvements which are being used with the
knowledge of the owner for the manufacturing, compounding, processing,
delivery, importing, or exporting of any controlled substance, or which have
been acquired in whole or in part with proceeds traceable to an exchange or
series of exchanges in violation of this chapter or chapter 69.41 or 69.52 RCW,
if such activity is not less than a class C felony and a substantial nexus
exists between the commercial production or sale of the controlled substance
and the real property. However:

(i) No property may be
forfeited pursuant to this subsection, to the extent of the interest of an
owner, by reason of any act or omission committed or omitted without the
owner's knowledge or consent;

(ii) The bona fide gift
of a controlled substance, legend drug, or imitation controlled substance shall
not result in the forfeiture of real property;

(iii) The possession of
marijuana shall not result in the forfeiture of real property unless the
marijuana is possessed for commercial purposes, the amount possessed is five or
more plants or one pound or more of marijuana, and a substantial nexus exists
between the possession of marijuana and the real property. In such a case, the
intent of the offender shall be determined by the preponderance of the
evidence, including the offender's prior criminal history, the amount of
marijuana possessed by the offender, the sophistication of the activity or
equipment used by the offender, and other evidence which demonstrates the
offender's intent to engage in commercial activity;

(iv) The unlawful sale
of marijuana or a legend drug shall not result in the forfeiture of real
property unless the sale was forty grams or more in the case of marijuana or
one hundred dollars or more in the case of a legend drug, and a substantial
nexus exists between the unlawful sale and the real property; and

(v) A forfeiture of
real property encumbered by a bona fide security interest is subject to the
interest of the secured party if the secured party, at the time the security
interest was created, neither had knowledge of nor consented to the act or
omission.

(b) Real or personal
property subject to forfeiture under this chapter may be seized by any board
inspector or law enforcement officer of this state upon process issued by any
superior court having jurisdiction over the property. Seizure of real property
shall include the filing of a lis pendens by the seizing agency. Real property
seized under this section shall not be transferred or otherwise conveyed until
ninety days after seizure or until a judgment of forfeiture is entered,
whichever is later: PROVIDED, That real property seized under this section may
be transferred or conveyed to any person or entity who acquires title by
foreclosure or deed in lieu of foreclosure of a security interest. Seizure of
personal property without process may be made if:

(1) The seizure is
incident to an arrest or a search under a search warrant or an inspection under
an administrative inspection warrant;

(2) The property
subject to seizure has been the subject of a prior judgment in favor of the
state in a criminal injunction or forfeiture proceeding based upon this
chapter;

(3) A board inspector
or law enforcement officer has probable cause to believe that the property is
directly or indirectly dangerous to health or safety; or

(4) The board inspector
or law enforcement officer has probable cause to believe that the property was
used or is intended to be used in violation of this chapter.

(c) In the event of
seizure pursuant to subsection (b), proceedings for forfeiture shall be deemed
commenced by the seizure. The law enforcement agency under whose authority the
seizure was made shall cause notice to be served within fifteen days following
the seizure on the owner of the property seized and the person in charge
thereof and any person having any known right or interest therein, including
any community property interest, of the seizure and intended forfeiture of the
seized property. Service of notice of seizure of real property shall be made
according to the rules of civil procedure. However, the state may not obtain a
default judgment with respect to real property against a party who is served by
substituted service absent an affidavit stating that a good faith effort has
been made to ascertain if the defaulted party is incarcerated within the state,
and that there is no present basis to believe that the party is incarcerated
within the state. Notice of seizure in the case of property subject to a
security interest that has been perfected by filing a financing statement in
accordance with chapter 62A.9A RCW, or a certificate of title, shall be made by
service upon the secured party or the secured party's assignee at the address
shown on the financing statement or the certificate of title. The notice of
seizure in other cases may be served by any method authorized by law or court
rule including but not limited to service by certified mail with return receipt
requested. Service by mail shall be deemed complete upon mailing within the
fifteen day period following the seizure.

(d) If no person
notifies the seizing law enforcement agency in writing of the person's claim of
ownership or right to possession of items specified in subsection (a)(4),
(a)(7), or (a)(8) of this section within forty-five days of the seizure in the
case of personal property and ninety days in the case of real property, the
item seized shall be deemed forfeited. The community property interest in real
property of a person whose spouse committed a violation giving rise to seizure
of the real property may not be forfeited if the person did not participate in
the violation.

(e) If any person
notifies the seizing law enforcement agency in writing of the person's claim of
ownership or right to possession of items specified in subsection (a)(2),
(a)(3), (a)(4), (a)(5), (a)(6), (a)(7), or (a)(8) of this section within
forty-five days of the seizure in the case of personal property and ninety days
in the case of real property, the person or persons shall be afforded a
reasonable opportunity to be heard as to the claim or right. The hearing shall
be before the chief law enforcement officer of the seizing agency or the chief
law enforcement officer's designee, except where the seizing agency is a state
agency as defined in RCW 34.12.020(4), the hearing shall be before the chief
law enforcement officer of the seizing agency or an administrative law judge
appointed under chapter 34.12 RCW, except that any person asserting a claim or
right may remove the matter to a court of competent jurisdiction. Removal of
any matter involving personal property may only be accomplished according to
the rules of civil procedure. The person seeking removal of the matter must
serve process against the state, county, political subdivision, or municipality
that operates the seizing agency, and any other party of interest, in
accordance with RCW 4.28.080 or 4.92.020, within forty-five days after the
person seeking removal has notified the seizing law enforcement agency of the
person's claim of ownership or right to possession. The court to which the matter
is to be removed shall be the district court when the aggregate value of
personal property is within the jurisdictional limit set forth in RCW
3.66.020. A hearing before the seizing agency and any appeal therefrom shall
be under Title 34 RCW. In all cases, the burden of proof is upon the law
enforcement agency to establish, by a preponderance of the evidence, that the
property is subject to forfeiture.

The seizing law
enforcement agency shall promptly return the article or articles to the
claimant upon a determination by the administrative law judge or court that the
claimant is the present lawful owner or is lawfully entitled to possession
thereof of items specified in subsection (a)(2), (a)(3), (a)(4), (a)(5),
(a)(6), (a)(7), or (a)(8) of this section.

(f) In any proceeding
to forfeit property under this title, where the claimant substantially
prevails, the claimant is entitled to reasonable attorneys' fees reasonably
incurred by the claimant. In addition, in a court hearing between two or more claimants
to the article or articles involved, the prevailing party is entitled to a
judgment for costs and reasonable attorneys' fees.

(g) When property is
forfeited under this chapter the board or seizing law enforcement agency may:

(1) Retain it for official
use or upon application by any law enforcement agency of this state release
such property to such agency for the exclusive use of enforcing the provisions
of this chapter;

(2) Sell that which is
not required to be destroyed by law and which is not harmful to the public;

(3) Request the
appropriate sheriff or director of public safety to take custody of the
property and remove it for disposition in accordance with law; or

(4) Forward it to the
drug enforcement administration for disposition.

(h)(1) When property is
forfeited, the seizing agency shall keep a record indicating the identity of
the prior owner, if known, a description of the property, the disposition of
the property, the value of the property at the time of seizure, and the amount
of proceeds realized from disposition of the property.

(2) Each seizing agency
shall retain records of forfeited property for at least seven years.

(3) Each seizing agency
shall file a report including a copy of the records of forfeited property with
the state treasurer each calendar quarter.

(4) The quarterly
report need not include a record of forfeited property that is still being held
for use as evidence during the investigation or prosecution of a case or during
the appeal from a conviction.

(i)(1) By January 31st
of each year, each seizing agency shall remit to the state treasurer an amount
equal to ten percent of the net proceeds of any property forfeited during the
preceding calendar year. Money remitted shall be deposited in the violence
reduction and drug enforcement account under RCW 69.50.520.

(2) The net proceeds of
forfeited property is the value of the forfeitable interest in the property
after deducting the cost of satisfying any bona fide security interest to which
the property is subject at the time of seizure; and in the case of sold
property, after deducting the cost of sale, including reasonable fees or
commissions paid to independent selling agents, and the cost of any valid
landlord's claim for damages under subsection (o) of this section.

(3) The value of sold
forfeited property is the sale price. The value of retained forfeited property
is the fair market value of the property at the time of seizure, determined
when possible by reference to an applicable commonly used index, such as the
index used by the department of licensing for valuation of motor vehicles. A
seizing agency may use, but need not use, an independent qualified appraiser to
determine the value of retained property. If an appraiser is used, the value
of the property appraised is net of the cost of the appraisal. The value of
destroyed property and retained firearms or illegal property is zero.

(j) Forfeited property
and ((net)) proceeds ((not required to be paid to the state treasurer
shall be retained by the seizing law enforcement agency exclusively for the
expansion and improvement of controlled substances related law enforcement
activity. Money retained under this section may not be used to supplant
preexisting funding sources)) shall be disposed of or distributed as
specified in section 1 of this act.

(k) Controlled
substances listed in Schedule I, II, III, IV, and V that are possessed,
transferred, sold, or offered for sale in violation of this chapter are
contraband and shall be seized and summarily forfeited to the state.
Controlled substances listed in Schedule I, II, III, IV, and V, which are
seized or come into the possession of the board, the owners of which are
unknown, are contraband and shall be summarily forfeited to the board.

(l) Species of plants
from which controlled substances in Schedules I and II may be derived which
have been planted or cultivated in violation of this chapter, or of which the
owners or cultivators are unknown, or which are wild growths, may be seized and
summarily forfeited to the board.

(m) The failure, upon
demand by a board inspector or law enforcement officer, of the person in
occupancy or in control of land or premises upon which the species of plants
are growing or being stored to produce an appropriate registration or proof
that he is the holder thereof constitutes authority for the seizure and
forfeiture of the plants.

(n) Upon the entry of
an order of forfeiture of real property, the court shall forward a copy of the
order to the assessor of the county in which the property is located. Orders
for the forfeiture of real property shall be entered by the superior court,
subject to court rules. Such an order shall be filed by the seizing agency in
the county auditor's records in the county in which the real property is
located.

(o) A landlord may
assert a claim against proceeds from the sale of assets seized and forfeited
under subsection (g)(2) of this section, only if:

(1) A law enforcement officer,
while acting in his or her official capacity, directly caused damage to the
complaining landlord's property while executing a search of a tenant's
residence; and

(2) The landlord has
applied any funds remaining in the tenant's deposit, to which the landlord has
a right under chapter 59.18 RCW, to cover the damage directly caused by a law
enforcement officer prior to asserting a claim under the provisions of this
section;

(i) Only if the funds
applied under (2) of this subsection are insufficient to satisfy the damage
directly caused by a law enforcement officer, may the landlord seek
compensation for the damage by filing a claim against the governmental entity
under whose authority the law enforcement agency operates within thirty days
after the search;

(ii) Only if the
governmental entity denies or fails to respond to the landlord's claim within
sixty days of the date of filing, may the landlord collect damages under this
subsection by filing within thirty days of denial or the expiration of the sixty-day
period, whichever occurs first, a claim with the seizing law enforcement
agency. The seizing law enforcement agency must notify the landlord of the
status of the claim by the end of the thirty-day period. Nothing in this
section requires the claim to be paid by the end of the sixty-day or thirty-day
period.

(3) For any claim filed
under (2) of this subsection, the law enforcement agency shall pay the claim
unless the agency provides substantial proof that the landlord either:

(i) Knew or consented
to actions of the tenant in violation of this chapter or chapter 69.41 or 69.52
RCW; or

(ii) Failed to respond
to a notification of the illegal activity, provided by a law enforcement agency
under RCW 59.18.075, within seven days of receipt of notification of the
illegal activity.

(p) The landlord's
claim for damages under subsection (o) of this section may not include a claim
for loss of business and is limited to:

(1) Damage to tangible
property and clean-up costs;

(2) The lesser of the
cost of repair or fair market value of the damage directly caused by a law
enforcement officer;

(3) The proceeds from
the sale of the specific tenant's property seized and forfeited under
subsection (g)(2) of this section; and

(4) The proceeds
available after the seizing law enforcement agency satisfies any bona fide
security interest in the tenant's property and costs related to sale of the
tenant's property as provided by subsection (i)(2) of this section.

(q) Subsections (o) and
(p) of this section do not limit any other rights a landlord may have against a
tenant to collect for damages. However, if a law enforcement agency satisfies
a landlord's claim under subsection (o) of this section, the rights the
landlord has against the tenant for damages directly caused by a law
enforcement officer under the terms of the landlord and tenant's contract are
subrogated to the law enforcement agency.

(r) Civil
forfeitures of property under this section are subject to section 1 of this
act, and in case of conflict between section 1 of this act and this section,
section 1 of this act shall control.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 3. If any provision of this
act or its application to any person or circumstance is held invalid, the
remainder of the act or the application of the provision to other persons or
circumstances is not affected.

---
END ---