BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF
WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1. RCW 26.44.020 and 2000 c
162 s 19 are each amended to read as follows:

The definitions in this
section apply throughout this chapter unless the context clearly requires
otherwise.

(1) "Court"
means the superior court of the state of Washington, juvenile department.

(2) "Law
enforcement agency" means the police department, the prosecuting attorney,
the state patrol, the director of public safety, or the office of the sheriff.

(3) "Practitioner
of the healing arts" or "practitioner" means a person licensed
by this state to practice podiatric medicine and surgery, optometry,
chiropractic, nursing, dentistry, osteopathic medicine and surgery, or medicine
and surgery or to provide other health services. The term
"practitioner" includes a duly accredited Christian Science
practitioner: PROVIDED, HOWEVER, That a person who is being furnished
Christian Science treatment by a duly accredited Christian Science practitioner
will not be considered, for that reason alone, a neglected person for the
purposes of this chapter.

(4)
"Institution" means a private or public hospital or any other
facility providing medical diagnosis, treatment or care.

(5)
"Department" means the state department of social and health
services.

(6) "Child"
or "children" means any person under the age of eighteen years of
age.

(7) "Professional
school personnel" include, but are not limited to, teachers, counselors,
administrators, child care facility personnel, and school nurses.

(8) "Social
service counselor" means anyone engaged in a professional capacity during
the regular course of employment in encouraging or promoting the health,
welfare, support or education of children, or providing social services to
adults or families, including mental health, drug and alcohol treatment, and domestic
violence programs, whether in an individual capacity, or as an employee or
agent of any public or private organization or institution.

(9)
"Psychologist" means any person licensed to practice psychology under
chapter 18.83 RCW, whether acting in an individual capacity or as an employee
or agent of any public or private organization or institution.

(10)
"Pharmacist" means any registered pharmacist under chapter 18.64 RCW,
whether acting in an individual capacity or as an employee or agent of any public
or private organization or institution.

(11) "Clergy"
means any regularly licensed or ordained minister, priest, or rabbi of any
church or religious denomination, whether acting in an individual capacity or
as an employee or agent of any public or private organization or institution.

(12) "Abuse or
neglect" means the injury, sexual abuse, or sexual exploitation((,
negligent treatment, or maltreatment)) of a child by any person under
circumstances which indicate that the child's health, welfare, ((and)) or
safety is harmed, excluding conduct permitted under RCW 9A.16.100 , or the
negligent treatment or maltreatment of a child by a person legally responsible
for or providing care to the child under circumstances which indicate that the
child's health, welfare, or safety is harmed or is at substantial risk of harm.
An abused child is a child who has been subjected to child abuse or neglect as
defined in this section.

(13) "Child
protective services section" means the child protective services section
of the department.

(14) "Sexual
exploitation" includes: (a) Allowing, permitting, or encouraging a child
to engage in prostitution by any person; or (b) allowing, permitting,
encouraging, or engaging in the obscene or pornographic photographing, filming,
or depicting of a child by any person.

(15) "Negligent
treatment or maltreatment" means an act or omission that evidences a
serious disregard of consequences of such magnitude as to constitute a clear
and present danger to the child's health, welfare, ((and)) or
safety. The fact that siblings share a bedroom is not, in and of itself,
negligent treatment or maltreatment.

(16) "Child
protective services" means those services provided by the department
designed to protect children from child abuse and neglect and safeguard such
children from future abuse and neglect, and conduct investigations of child
abuse and neglect reports. Investigations may be conducted regardless of the
location of the alleged abuse or neglect. Child protective services includes
referral to services to ameliorate conditions that endanger the welfare of
children, the coordination of necessary programs and services relevant to the
prevention, intervention, and treatment of child abuse and neglect, and
services to children to ensure that each child has a permanent home. In
determining whether protective services should be provided, the department
shall not decline to provide such services solely because of the child's
unwillingness or developmental inability to describe the nature and severity of
the abuse or neglect.

(17) "Malice"
or "maliciously" means an evil intent, wish, or design to vex, annoy,
or injure another person. Such malice may be inferred from an act done in
willful disregard of the rights of another, or an act wrongfully done without
just cause or excuse, or an act or omission of duty betraying a willful
disregard of social duty.

(18) "Sexually
aggressive youth" means a child who is defined in RCW 74.13.075(1)(b) as
being a sexually aggressive youth.

(19)
"Unfounded" means available information indicates that, more likely
than not, child abuse or neglect did not occur. No unfounded allegation of
child abuse or neglect may be disclosed to a child-placing agency, private
adoption agency, or any other provider licensed under chapter 74.15 RCW.

Sec. 2. RCW 26.44.015 and 1999 c
176 s 28 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) This chapter shall
not be construed to authorize interference with child-raising practices,
including reasonable parental discipline, which are not injurious to the
child's health, welfare, and safety.

(2) Nothing in this
chapter may be used to prohibit the reasonable use of corporal punishment as a
means of discipline.

(3) No parent or
guardian may be deemed abusive or neglectful solely by reason of the parent's
or child's blindness, deafness, developmental disability, or other handicap.

(4) No
parent or guardian may be deemed abusive or neglectful when the alleged abuse
or neglect results primarily from the financial inability of the parent or
guardian, and no services for relief have been offered to or rejected by the
parent or guardian.

---
END ---