BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF
WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec.
1. A new section is added
to chapter 9A.42 RCW to read as follows:

(1) A person is guilty
of the crime of criminal mistreatment in the fourth degree if the person is (a)
the parent of a child; (b) entrusted with the physical custody of a child; or
(c) employed to provide to the child the basic necessities of life, and leaves
the child in the care or custody of another person who is not a parent,
guardian, or lawful custodian of the child, knowing that the person is
registered or required to register as a sex offender under the laws of this
state, or a law or ordinance in another jurisdiction with similar requirements,
because of a sex offense against a child.

(2) It is an
affirmative defense to the charge of criminal mistreatment in the fourth degree
under this section, that the defendant must prove by a preponderance of the
evidence, that a court has entered an order allowing the offender to have
unsupervised contact with children, or that the offender is allowed to have
unsupervised contact with the child in question under a family reunification
plan, which has been approved by a court, the department of corrections, or the
department of social and health services in accordance with department
policies.

(3)
Criminal mistreatment in the fourth degree is a misdemeanor.

--- END ---