BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF
WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1. RCW 72.01.410 and 1997 c
338 s 41 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) Whenever any child
under the age of eighteen is convicted in the courts of this state of a crime
amounting to a felony, and is committed for a term of confinement in a
correctional institution wherein adults are confined, the secretary of
corrections, after making an independent assessment and evaluation of the child
and determining that the needs and correctional goals for the child could
better be met by the programs and housing environment provided by the juvenile
correctional institution, with the consent of the secretary of social and
health services, may transfer such child to a juvenile correctional
institution, or to such other institution as is now, or may hereafter be
authorized by law to receive such child, until such time as the child arrives
at the age of twenty-one years, whereupon the child shall be returned to the
institution of original commitment. Retention within a juvenile detention
facility or return to an adult correctional facility shall regularly be
reviewed by the secretary of corrections and the secretary of social and health
services with a determination made based on the level of maturity and
sophistication of the individual, the behavior and progress while within the
juvenile detention facility, security needs, and the program/treatment
alternatives which would best prepare the individual for a successful return to
the community. Notice of such transfers shall be given to the clerk of the
committing court and the parents, guardian, or next of kin of such child, if
known.

(2)(a) Except as
provided in (b) and (c) of this subsection, an offender under the age of
eighteen who is convicted in adult criminal court and who is committed to a
term of confinement at the department of corrections must be placed in a
housing unit, or a portion of a housing unit, that is separated from offenders
eighteen years of age or older, until the offender reaches the age of eighteen.

(b) An offender who
reaches eighteen years of age may remain in a housing unit for offenders under
the age of eighteen if the secretary of corrections determines that: (i) The
offender's needs and the correctional goals for the offender could continue to
be better met by the programs and housing environment that is separate from
offenders eighteen years of age and older; and (ii) the programs or housing
environment for offenders under the age of eighteen will not be substantially
affected by the continued placement of the offender in that environment. The
offender may remain placed in a housing unit for offenders under the age of
eighteen until such time as the secretary of corrections determines that the
offender's needs and correctional goals are no longer better met in that
environment but in no case past the offender's twenty-first birthday.

(c) An offender
under the age of eighteen may be housed in an intensive management unit or
administrative segregation unit containing offenders eighteen years of age or
older if it is necessary for the safety or security of the offender or staff.
In these cases, the offender shall be kept physically separate from other
offenders at all times.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 2. This act is necessary for
the immediate preservation of the public peace, health, or safety, or support
of the state government and its existing public institutions, and takes effect
immediately.

---
END ---