BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF
WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1. RCW 9A.42.010 and 1997 c
392 s 508 are each amended to read as follows:

As used in this
chapter:

(1) "Basic
necessities of life" means food, water, shelter, clothing, and medically
necessary health care, including but not limited to health-related treatment or
activities, hygiene, oxygen, and medication.

(2)(a) "Bodily
injury" means physical pain or injury, illness, or an impairment of
physical condition;

(b) "Substantial
bodily harm" means bodily injury which involves a temporary but
substantial disfigurement, or which causes a temporary but substantial loss or
impairment of the function of any bodily part or organ, or which causes a
fracture of any bodily part;

(c) "Great bodily
harm" means bodily injury which creates a high probability of death, or
which causes serious permanent disfigurement, or which causes a permanent or
protracted loss or impairment of the function of any bodily part or organ.

(3) "Child"
means a person under eighteen years of age.

(4) "Dependent
person" means a person who, because of physical or mental disability, or
because of extreme advanced age, is dependent upon another person to provide
the basic necessities of life. A resident of a nursing home, as defined in RCW
18.51.010, a resident of an adult family home, as defined in RCW 70.128.010,
and a frail elder or vulnerable adult, as defined in RCW 74.34.020(((8)))
(13), is presumed to be a dependent person for purposes of this chapter.

(5)
"Employed" means hired by a dependent person, another person acting
on behalf of a dependent person, or by an organization or governmental entity,
to provide to a dependent person any of the basic necessities of life. A
person may be "employed" regardless of whether the person is paid for
the services or, if paid, regardless of who pays for the person's services.

(6) "Mental
disorder" means any organic, mental, or emotional impairment which has
substantial adverse effects on an individual's cognitive or volitional
functions.

(7)
"Parent" has its ordinary meaning and also includes a guardian and
the authorized agent of a parent or guardian.

(((7))) (8)
"Abandons" means leaving a child or other dependent person without
the means or ability to obtain one or more of the basic necessities of life.

Sec. 2. RCW 9A.42.035 and 2000 c
76 s 1 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) A person is guilty
of the crime of criminal mistreatment in the third degree if the person is the
parent of a child, is a person entrusted with the physical custody of a child
or other dependent person, or is a person employed to provide to the child or
dependent person the basic necessities of life, and either:

(a) With criminal
negligence, creates an imminent and substantial risk of substantial bodily harm
to a child or dependent person by withholding any of the basic necessities of
life; or

(b) With criminal
negligence, causes substantial bodily harm or harm that results in a mental
disorder to a child or dependent person by withholding any of the basic
necessities of life.

(2) Criminal
mistreatment in the third degree is a gross misdemeanor.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
3. A new section is added
to chapter 9A.42 RCW to read as follows:

(1) A person is guilty
of the crime of criminal mistreatment in the fourth degree if the person is the
parent of a child, is a person entrusted with the physical custody of a child
or other dependent person, or is a person employed to provide to the child or
dependent person the basic necessities of life, and either:

(a) With criminal
negligence, creates an imminent and substantial risk of bodily injury to a
child or dependent person by withholding any of the basic necessities of life;
or

(b) With criminal
negligence, causes bodily injury or extreme mental distress to a child or
dependent person by withholding the basic necessities of life.

(2) It is an
affirmative defense to the charge of criminal mistreatment in the fourth degree
that the defendant must prove by a preponderance of the evidence that the basic
necessities of life were withheld:

(a) As part of a
religious observance and no permanent injury or illness resulted; or

(b) As a disciplinary
measure for a reasonable period of time and no permanent injury or illness
resulted.

(3) Criminal
mistreatment in the fourth degree is a misdemeanor.

Sec. 4. RCW 9A.42.040 and 2000 c
76 s 2 are each amended to read as follows:

RCW 9A.42.020,
9A.42.030, ((and)) 9A.42.035, and section 3 of this act do not
apply to decisions to withdraw life support systems made in accordance with chapter
7.70 or 70.122 RCW by the dependent person, his or her legal surrogate, or
others with a legal duty to care for the dependent person.

Sec. 5. RCW 9A.42.045 and 2000 c
76 s 3 are each amended to read as follows:

RCW 9A.42.020,
9A.42.030, ((and)) 9A.42.035, and section 3 of this act do not
apply when a terminally ill or permanently unconscious person or his or her
legal surrogate, as set forth in chapter 7.70 RCW, requests, and the person
receives, palliative care from a licensed home health agency, hospice agency,
nursing home, or hospital providing care under the medical direction of a
physician. As used in this section, the terms "terminally ill" and
"permanently unconscious" have the same meaning as "terminal
condition" and "permanent unconscious condition" in chapter
70.122 RCW.

---
END ---