BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF
WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1. RCW 82.04.324 and 1995
2nd sp.s. c 9 s 3 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) As used in this
section:

(a) "Blood"
includes human whole blood, plasma, blood derivatives, and related products.

(b) "Bone"
includes human bone, bone marrow, and related products.

(c)(i) Before
January 1, 2001, "tissue" includes human musculoskeletal
tissue, musculoskeletal tissue derivatives, and related products.

(ii) On and after
January 1, 2001, "tissue" includes human musculoskeletal tissue,
musculoskeletal tissue derivatives, organs, body parts, and related products.

(d) "Blood, bone,
or tissue bank" means an organization exempt from federal income tax under
section 501(c)(3) of the federal internal revenue code, organized solely for
the purpose of transplanting or replacing human blood, bone, or tissue, and
can include performing research on, procuring, testing, processing,
storing, packaging, distributing, transporting, retrieving, or using
blood, bone, or tissue, when those activities are integrally related to the
transplanting or replacing of human blood, bone, or tissue.

(e) "Medical
supplies" means any item of tangible personal property, including any
repair and replacement parts for such tangible personal property, used by a
blood, tissue, or bone bank for the purpose of performing research on,
procuring, testing, processing, storing, packaging, distributing, or using
blood, bone, or tissue. The term includes tangible personal property used to:

(i) Provide preparatory
treatment of blood, bone, or tissue;

(ii) Control, guide,
measure, tune, verify, align, regulate, test, or physically support blood,
bone, or tissue; and

(iii) Protect the
health and safety of employees or others present during research on, procuring,
testing, processing, storing, packaging, distributing, or using blood, bone, or
tissue.

(f)
"Chemical" means any catalyst, solvent, water, acid, oil, or other
additive that physically or chemically interacts with blood, bone, or tissue.

(g)
"Materials" means any item of tangible personal property, including,
but not limited to, bags, packs, collecting sets, filtering materials, testing
reagents, antisera, and refrigerants used or consumed in performing research
on, procuring, testing, processing, storing, packaging, distributing, or using
blood, bone, or tissue.

(h)
"Research" means basic and applied research that has as its objective
the design, development, refinement, testing, marketing, or commercialization
of a product, service, or process.

(2) This chapter does
not apply to amounts received by blood, bone, or tissue banks, to the extent
the amounts are exempt from federal income tax.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 2. The amendment to RCW
82.04.324(1)(d) by this act is a clarification of the original intent of the
legislature and is retroactive. The remainder of this act is retroactive to
January 1, 2001.

---
END ---