BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF
WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1. RCW 38.52.040 and 1995 c
269 s 1202 are each amended to read as follows:

(1)(a) There is
hereby created the emergency management council (hereinafter called the
council), to consist of ((not more than seventeen)) members who shall be
appointed by the governor. The membership of the council shall include, but
not be limited to, representatives of city and county governments, sheriffs and
police chiefs, the Washington state patrol, the military department, the department
of ecology, state and local fire chiefs, local public health agencies,
seismic safety experts, state and local emergency management directors, search
and rescue volunteers, medical professions who have expertise in emergency
medical care, building officials, ((and)) private industry, and other
members the governor deems necessary. The representatives of private
industry shall include persons knowledgeable in emergency and hazardous
materials management.

(b) In addition to
the members specified in (a) of this subsection, the council shall include four
legislative members appointed by the governor to serve as nonvoting advisory
members of the council. The legislative members shall be appointed as follows:

(i) Two members
shall be appointed from the house of representatives, one from each of the two
largest caucuses in the house of representatives, based on the recommendations
of the speaker and the minority leader of the house of representatives; and

(ii) Two members
shall be appointed from the senate, one from each of the two largest caucuses
in the senate, based on the recommendations of the senate majority leader and
minority leader.

(2) The council
members shall elect a chairman from within the council membership. The members
of the council shall serve without compensation, but legislative members may
be reimbursed in accordance with RCW 44.04.120 for travel expenses incurred in
the performance of their duties, and nonlegislative members may be reimbursed
for their travel expenses incurred in the performance of their duties in
accordance with RCW 43.03.050 and 43.03.060 ((as now existing or hereafter
amended)).

(((2))) (3)
The emergency management council shall advise the governor and the director on all
matters pertaining to state and local emergency management. The council may
appoint such ad hoc committees, subcommittees, and working groups as are
required to develop specific recommendations for the improvement of emergency
management practices, standards, policies, or procedures. The council shall
ensure that the governor receives an annual assessment of statewide emergency
preparedness including, but not limited to, specific progress on hazard
mitigation and reduction efforts, implementation of seismic safety
improvements, reduction of flood hazards, and coordination of hazardous
materials planning and response activities.

(4)
The council or a subcommittee thereof shall periodically convene in special
session and serve during those sessions as the state emergency response
commission required by P.L. 99-499, the emergency planning and community
right-to-know act. When sitting in session as the state emergency response
commission, the council shall confine its deliberations to those items specified
in federal statutes and state administrative rules governing the coordination
of hazardous materials policy. The council shall review administrative rules
governing state and local emergency management practices and recommend
necessary revisions to the director.

--- END ---