BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF
WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1. RCW 41.40.795 and 2000 c
247 s 304 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) As used in this
section, unless the context clearly requires otherwise:

(a) "Transfer
period" means the time during which a member of one of the groups of plan
2 members identified in subsection (2) of this section may choose to
irrevocably transfer from plan 2 to plan 3.

(b) "Transfer
basis" means the accumulated contributions present in a member's savings
fund on March 1, 2002, less fifty percent of any contributions made pursuant to
RCW 41.50.165(2), which is the basis for calculation of the plan 2 to plan 3
additional transfer payment.

(c) "Additional
transfer payment date" means June 1, 2003, the date of the additional
transfer payment made according to subsection (6) of this section.

(2) Every plan 2 member
employed by an employer in an eligible position has the option during their
transfer period to make an irrevocable transfer to plan 3 according to the
following schedule:

(a) For those members
employed by state agencies and institutes of higher education the transfer
period means the period between March 1, 2002, and September 1, 2002.

(b) For those members
employed by other organizations the transfer period means the period between
September 1, 2002, and June 1, 2003.

(c) For those members
employed by more than one employer within the retirement system, and whose
transfer period is different between one employer and another, the member's
transfer period is the last period that is available from any of that member's
employers within the retirement system.

(3) All service credit
in plan 2 shall be transferred to the defined benefit portion of plan 3.

(4)(a) Anyone who first
became a state or higher education member of plan 2 before March 1, 2002, or a
local government member of plan 2 before September 1, 2002, who wishes to
transfer to plan 3 after their transfer period may transfer during the month of
January in any following year, provided that the member earns service credit
for that month.

(b) Anyone who chose to
become a state or higher education member of plan 2 on or after March 1, 2002,
or a local government member of plan 2 on or after September 1, 2002, is
prohibited from transferring to plan 3 under (a) of this subsection.

(5) The accumulated
contributions in plan 2, less fifty percent of any contributions made pursuant
to RCW 41.50.165(2) shall be transferred to the member's account in the defined
contribution portion established in chapter 41.34 RCW, pursuant to procedures
developed by the department and subject to RCW 41.34.090. Contributions made
pursuant to RCW 41.50.165(2) that are not transferred to the member's account
shall be transferred to the fund created in RCW 41.50.075(3), except that
interest earned on all such contributions shall be transferred to the member's
account.

(6) ((Anyone who
requests to transfer under this section during their transfer period, and
establishes)) Those members employed by state agencies and institutes of
higher education who request to transfer under this section during their
transfer period and establish service credit for August 2002, and those members
employed by other organizations and who establish service credit for either
August 2002 or February 2003, shall have their member account:

(a) If a member's transfer
period is that described in subsection (2)(a) of this section, increased by one
hundred ten percent of the transfer basis;

(b) If a member's
transfer period is that described in subsection (2)(b) of this section,
increased by one hundred eleven percent of the transfer basis; and

(c) Deposited into the
member's individual account on the additional transfer payment date.

(7) If a member who
requests to transfer dies before June 1, 2003, the additional payment provided
by this section shall be paid to the member's estate, or the person or persons,
trust, or organization the member nominated by written designation duly
executed and filed with the department.

(8) Anyone previously
retired from plan 2 is prohibited from transferring to plan 3.

(9) The
legislature reserves the right to discontinue the right to transfer under this
section and to modify and to discontinue the right to an additional payment
under this section for any plan 2 members who have not previously transferred
to plan 3.

--- END ---