BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF
WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1. RCW 41.32.010 and 1997 c
254 s 3 are each amended to read as follows:

As used in this
chapter, unless a different meaning is plainly required by the context:

(1)(a)
"Accumulated contributions" for plan 1 members, means the sum of all
regular annuity contributions and, except for the purpose of withdrawal at the
time of retirement, any amount paid under RCW 41.50.165(2) with regular
interest thereon.

(b) "Accumulated
contributions" for plan 2 members, means the sum of all contributions
standing to the credit of a member in the member's individual account,
including any amount paid under RCW 41.50.165(2), together with the regular
interest thereon.

(2) "Actuarial
equivalent" means a benefit of equal value when computed upon the basis of
such mortality tables and regulations as shall be adopted by the director and
regular interest.

(3) "Annuity"
means the moneys payable per year during life by reason of accumulated
contributions of a member.

(4) "Member
reserve" means the fund in which all of the accumulated contributions of
members are held.

(5)(a)
"Beneficiary" for plan 1 members, means any person in receipt of a
retirement allowance or other benefit provided by this chapter.

(b)
"Beneficiary" for plan 2 and plan 3 members, means any person in
receipt of a retirement allowance or other benefit provided by this chapter
resulting from service rendered to an employer by another person.

(6)
"Contract" means any agreement for service and compensation between a
member and an employer.

(7) "Creditable
service" means membership service plus prior service for which credit is
allowable. This subsection shall apply only to plan 1 members.

(8)
"Dependent" means receiving one‑half or more of support from a
member.

(9) "Disability
allowance" means monthly payments during disability. This subsection
shall apply only to plan 1 members.

(10)(a) "Earnable
compensation" for plan 1 members, means:

(i) All salaries and
wages paid by an employer to an employee member of the retirement system for
personal services rendered during a fiscal year. In all cases where
compensation includes maintenance the employer shall fix the value of that part
of the compensation not paid in money.

(ii) For an employee
member of the retirement system teaching in an extended school year program,
two consecutive extended school years, as defined by the employer school
district, may be used as the annual period for determining earnable
compensation in lieu of the two fiscal years.

(iii)
"Earnable compensation" for plan 1 members also includes the
following actual or imputed payments, which are not paid for personal services:

(A) Retroactive
payments to an individual by an employer on reinstatement of the employee in a
position, or payments by an employer to an individual in lieu of reinstatement
in a position which are awarded or granted as the equivalent of the salary or
wages which the individual would have earned during a payroll period shall be
considered earnable compensation and the individual shall receive the
equivalent service credit.

(B) If a leave of
absence, without pay, is taken by a member for the purpose of serving as a
member of the state legislature, and such member has served in the legislature
five or more years, the salary which would have been received for the position
from which the leave of absence was taken shall be considered as compensation
earnable if the employee's contribution thereon is paid by the employee. In
addition, where a member has been a member of the state legislature for five or
more years, earnable compensation for the member's two highest compensated
consecutive years of service shall include a sum not to exceed thirty‑six
hundred dollars for each of such two consecutive years, regardless of whether
or not legislative service was rendered during those two years.

(((iii))) (iv)
For members employed less than full time under written contract with a school
district, or community college district, in an instructional position, for
which the member receives service credit of less than one year in all of the
years used to determine the earnable compensation used for computing benefits
due under RCW 41.32.497, 41.32.498, and 41.32.520, the member may elect to have
earnable compensation defined as provided in RCW 41.32.345. For the purposes
of this subsection, the term "instructional position" means a
position in which more than seventy‑five percent of the member's time is
spent as a classroom instructor (including office hours), a librarian, or a
counselor. Earnable compensation shall be so defined only for the purpose of
the calculation of retirement benefits and only as necessary to insure that
members who receive fractional service credit under RCW 41.32.270 receive
benefits proportional to those received by members who have received full‑time
service credit.

(((iv))) (v)
"Earnable compensation" does not include:

(A) Remuneration for
unused sick leave authorized under RCW 41.04.340, 28A.400.210, or 28A.310.490;

(B) Remuneration for
unused annual leave in excess of thirty days as authorized by RCW 43.01.044 and
43.01.041.

(b) "Earnable
compensation" for plan 2 and plan 3 members, means salaries or wages
earned by a member during a payroll period for personal services, including
overtime payments, and shall include wages and salaries deferred under
provisions established pursuant to sections 403(b), 414(h), and 457 of the
United States Internal Revenue Code, but shall exclude lump sum payments for
deferred annual sick leave, unused accumulated vacation, unused accumulated
annual leave, or any form of severance pay.

"Earnable
compensation" for plan 2 and plan 3 members also includes the following
actual or imputed payments which, except in the case of (b)(ii)(B) of this
subsection, are not paid for personal services:

(i) Retroactive
payments to an individual by an employer on reinstatement of the employee in a
position or payments by an employer to an individual in lieu of reinstatement
in a position which are awarded or granted as the equivalent of the salary or
wages which the individual would have earned during a payroll period shall be
considered earnable compensation, to the extent provided above, and the
individual shall receive the equivalent service credit.

(ii) In any year in
which a member serves in the legislature the member shall have the option of
having such member's earnable compensation be the greater of:

(A) The earnable
compensation the member would have received had such member not served in the
legislature; or

(B) Such member's
actual earnable compensation received for teaching and legislative service
combined. Any additional contributions to the retirement system required
because compensation earnable under (b)(ii)(A) of this subsection is greater
than compensation earnable under (b)(ii)(B) of this subsection shall be paid by
the member for both member and employer contributions.

(11)
"Employer" means the state of Washington, the school district, or any
agency of the state of Washington by which the member is paid.

(12) "Fiscal
year" means a year which begins July 1st and ends June 30th of the
following year.

(13) "Former state
fund" means the state retirement fund in operation for teachers under
chapter 187, Laws of 1923, as amended.

(14) "Local
fund" means any of the local retirement funds for teachers operated in any
school district in accordance with the provisions of chapter 163, Laws of 1917
as amended.

(15) "Member"
means any teacher included in the membership of the retirement system. Also,
any other employee of the public schools who, on July 1, 1947, had not elected
to be exempt from membership and who, prior to that date, had by an authorized
payroll deduction, contributed to the member reserve.

(16) "Membership
service" means service rendered subsequent to the first day of eligibility
of a person to membership in the retirement system: PROVIDED, That where a
member is employed by two or more employers the individual shall receive no
more than one service credit month during any calendar month in which multiple
service is rendered. The provisions of this subsection shall apply only to
plan 1 members.

(17)
"Pension" means the moneys payable per year during life from the
pension reserve.

(18) "Pension
reserve" is a fund in which shall be accumulated an actuarial reserve
adequate to meet present and future pension liabilities of the system and from
which all pension obligations are to be paid.

(19) "Prior
service" means service rendered prior to the first date of eligibility to
membership in the retirement system for which credit is allowable. The
provisions of this subsection shall apply only to plan 1 members.

(20) "Prior
service contributions" means contributions made by a member to secure
credit for prior service. The provisions of this subsection shall apply only
to plan 1 members.

(21) "Public
school" means any institution or activity operated by the state of
Washington or any instrumentality or political subdivision thereof employing
teachers, except the University of Washington and Washington State University.

(22) "Regular
contributions" means the amounts required to be deducted from the
compensation of a member and credited to the member's individual account in the
member reserve. This subsection shall apply only to plan 1 members.

(23) "Regular interest"
means such rate as the director may determine.

(24)(a)
"Retirement allowance" for plan 1 members, means monthly payments
based on the sum of annuity and pension, or any optional benefits payable in
lieu thereof.

(b) "Retirement
allowance" for plan 2 and plan 3 members, means monthly payments to a
retiree or beneficiary as provided in this chapter.

(25) "Retirement
system" means the Washington state teachers' retirement system.

(26)(a)
"Service" for plan 1 members means the time during which a member has
been employed by an employer for compensation.

(i) If a member is
employed by two or more employers the individual shall receive no more than one
service credit month during any calendar month in which multiple service is
rendered.

(ii) As authorized by
RCW 28A.400.300, up to forty-five days of sick leave may be creditable as
service solely for the purpose of determining eligibility to retire under RCW
41.32.470.

(iii) As authorized in
RCW 41.32.065, service earned in an out-of-state retirement system that covers
teachers in public schools may be applied solely for the purpose of determining
eligibility to retire under RCW 41.32.470.

(b) "Service"
for plan 2 and plan 3 members, means periods of employment by a member for one
or more employers for which earnable compensation is earned subject to the
following conditions:

(i) A member employed
in an eligible position or as a substitute shall receive one service credit
month for each month of September through August of the following year if he or
she earns earnable compensation for eight hundred ten or more hours during that
period and is employed during nine of those months, except that a member may
not receive credit for any period prior to the member's employment in an
eligible position except as provided in RCW 41.32.812 and 41.50.132;

(ii) If a member is
employed either in an eligible position or as a substitute teacher for nine
months of the twelve month period between September through August of the
following year but earns earnable compensation for less than eight hundred ten
hours but for at least six hundred thirty hours, he or she will receive one‑half
of a service credit month for each month of the twelve month period;

(iii) All other members
in an eligible position or as a substitute teacher shall receive service credit
as follows:

(A) A service credit
month is earned in those calendar months where earnable compensation is earned
for ninety or more hours;

(B) A half-service
credit month is earned in those calendar months where earnable compensation is
earned for at least seventy hours but less than ninety hours; and

(C) A quarter-service
credit month is earned in those calendar months where earnable compensation is
earned for less than seventy hours.

(iv) Any person who is
a member of the teachers' retirement system and who is elected or appointed to
a state elective position may continue to be a member of the retirement system
and continue to receive a service credit month for each of the months in a
state elective position by making the required member contributions.

(v) When an individual
is employed by two or more employers the individual shall only receive one
month's service credit during any calendar month in which multiple service for
ninety or more hours is rendered.

(vi) As authorized by
RCW 28A.400.300, up to forty-five days of sick leave may be creditable as
service solely for the purpose of determining eligibility to retire under RCW
41.32.470. For purposes of plan 2 and plan 3 "forty-five days" as
used in RCW 28A.400.300 is equal to two service credit months. Use of less
than forty-five days of sick leave is creditable as allowed under this
subsection as follows:

(A) Less than eleven
days equals one-quarter service credit month;

(B) Eleven or more days
but less than twenty-two days equals one-half service credit month;

(C) Twenty-two days
equals one service credit month;

(D) More than
twenty-two days but less than thirty-three days equals one and one-quarter
service credit month;

(E) Thirty-three or
more days but less than forty-five days equals one and one-half service credit
month.

(vii) As authorized in
RCW 41.32.065, service earned in an out-of-state retirement system that covers
teachers in public schools may be applied solely for the purpose of determining
eligibility to retire under RCW 41.32.470.

(viii) The department
shall adopt rules implementing this subsection.

(27) "Service
credit year" means an accumulation of months of service credit which is
equal to one when divided by twelve.

(28) "Service
credit month" means a full service credit month or an accumulation of
partial service credit months that are equal to one.

(29)
"Teacher" means any person qualified to teach who is engaged by a
public school in an instructional, administrative, or supervisory capacity.
The term includes state, educational service district, and school district
superintendents and their assistants and all employees certificated by the
superintendent of public instruction; and in addition thereto any full time
school doctor who is employed by a public school and renders service of an
instructional or educational nature.

(30) "Average
final compensation" for plan 2 and plan 3 members, means the member's
average earnable compensation of the highest consecutive sixty service credit
months prior to such member's retirement, termination, or death. Periods
constituting authorized leaves of absence may not be used in the calculation of
average final compensation except under RCW 41.32.810(2).

(31)
"Retiree" means any person who has begun accruing a retirement
allowance or other benefit provided by this chapter resulting from service
rendered to an employer while a member.

(32)
"Department" means the department of retirement systems created in
chapter 41.50 RCW.

(33)
"Director" means the director of the department.

(34) "State
elective position" means any position held by any person elected or
appointed to state‑wide office or elected or appointed as a member of the
legislature.

(35) "State
actuary" or "actuary" means the person appointed pursuant to RCW
44.44.010(2).

(36) "Substitute
teacher" means:

(a) A teacher who is
hired by an employer to work as a temporary teacher, except for teachers who
are annual contract employees of an employer and are guaranteed a minimum
number of hours; or

(b) Teachers who either
(i) work in ineligible positions for more than one employer or (ii) work in an
ineligible position or positions together with an eligible position.

(37)(a) "Eligible
position" for plan 2 members from June 7, 1990, through September 1, 1991,
means a position which normally requires two or more uninterrupted months of
creditable service during September through August of the following year.

(b) "Eligible
position" for plan 2 and plan 3 on and after September 1, 1991, means a
position that, as defined by the employer, normally requires five or more
months of at least seventy hours of earnable compensation during September
through August of the following year.

(c) For purposes of
this chapter an employer shall not define "position" in such a manner
that an employee's monthly work for that employer is divided into more than one
position.

(d) The elected
position of the superintendent of public instruction is an eligible position.

(38) "Plan 1"
means the teachers' retirement system, plan 1 providing the benefits and
funding provisions covering persons who first became members of the system
prior to October 1, 1977.

(39) "Plan 2"
means the teachers' retirement system, plan 2 providing the benefits and
funding provisions covering persons who first became members of the system on
and after October 1, 1977, and prior to July 1, 1996.

(40) "Plan 3"
means the teachers' retirement system, plan 3 providing the benefits and
funding provisions covering persons who first become members of the system on
and after July 1, 1996, or who transfer under RCW 41.32.817.

(41) "Index"
means, for any calendar year, that year's annual average consumer price index,
Seattle, Washington area, for urban wage earners and clerical workers, all
items compiled by the bureau of labor statistics, United States department of
labor.

(42) "Index
A" means the index for the year prior to the determination of a
postretirement adjustment.

(43) "Index
B" means the index for the year prior to index A.

(44) "Index
year" means the earliest calendar year in which the index is more than
sixty percent of index A.

(45) "Adjustment
ratio" means the value of index A divided by index B.

(46) "Annual
increase" means, initially, fifty-nine cents per month per year of service
which amount shall be increased each July 1st by three percent, rounded to the
nearest cent.

(47) "Member
account" or "member's account" for purposes of plan 3 means the
sum of the contributions and earnings on behalf of the member in the defined
contribution portion of plan 3.

(48) "Separation
from service or employment" occurs when a person has terminated all
employment with an employer.

(49)
"Employed" or "employee" means a person who is providing
services for compensation to an employer, unless the person is free from the employer's
direction and control over the performance of work. The department shall adopt
rules and interpret this subsection consistent with common law.

--- END ---