BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF
WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec.
1. A new section is added
to chapter 41.40 RCW under the subchapter heading "provisions applicable
to plan 1, plan 2, and plan 3" to read as follows:

(1) A one hundred fifty
thousand dollar death benefit shall be paid to the member's estate, or such
person or persons, trust or organization as the member has nominated by written
designation duly executed and filed with the department. If no such designated
person or persons are still living at the time of the member's death, the
member's death benefit shall be paid to the member's surviving spouse as if in
fact the spouse had been nominated by written designation, or if there is no
surviving spouse, then to the member's legal representatives.

(2) The benefit under
this section shall be paid only where death occurs as a result of injuries
sustained in the course of employment. The determination of eligibility for
the benefit shall be made consistent with Title 51 RCW by the department of
labor and industries. The department of labor and industries shall notify the
department of retirement systems by order under RCW 51.52.050.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
2. A new section is added
to chapter 41.32 RCW under the subchapter heading "provisions applicable
to plan 1, plan 2, and plan 3" to read as follows:

(1) A one hundred fifty
thousand dollar death benefit shall be paid to the member's estate, or such
person or persons, trust or organization as the member has nominated by written
designation duly executed and filed with the department. If no such designated
person or persons are still living at the time of the member's death, the
member's death benefit shall be paid to the member's surviving spouse as if in
fact the spouse had been nominated by written designation, or if there is no
surviving spouse, then to the member's legal representatives.

(2) The benefit under
this section shall be paid only where death occurs as a result of injuries
sustained in the course of employment. The determination of eligibility for
the benefit shall be made consistent with Title 51 RCW by the department of
labor and industries. The department of labor and industries shall notify the
department of retirement systems by order under RCW 51.52.050.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
3. A new section is added
to chapter 41.35 RCW under the subchapter heading "provisions applicable
to plan 2 and plan 3" to read as follows:

(1) A one hundred fifty
thousand dollar death benefit shall be paid to the member's estate, or such
person or persons, trust or organization as the member has nominated by written
designation duly executed and filed with the department. If no such designated
person or persons are still living at the time of the member's death, the
member's death benefit shall be paid to the member's surviving spouse as if in
fact the spouse had been nominated by written designation, or if there is no
surviving spouse, then to the member's legal representatives.

(2) The benefit under
this section shall be paid only where death occurs as a result of injuries
sustained in the course of employment. The determination of eligibility for
the benefit shall be made consistent with Title 51 RCW by the department of
labor and industries. The department of labor and industries shall notify the
department of retirement systems by order under RCW 51.52.050.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
4. A new section is added
to chapter 41.04 RCW to read as follows:

A one
hundred fifty thousand dollar death benefit shall be paid as a sundry claim to
the estate of an employee of any state agency, the common school system of the
state, or institution of higher education who dies as a result of injuries sustained
in the course of employment and is not otherwise provided a death benefit
through coverage under their enrolled retirement system. The determination of
eligibility for the benefit shall be made consistent with Title 51 RCW by the
department of labor and industries. The department of labor and industries
shall notify the director of the department of general administration by order
under RCW 51.52.050.

---
END ---