BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF
WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1. RCW 76.09.050 and 1997 c
173 s 2 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) The board shall
establish by rule which forest practices shall be included within each of the
following classes:

Class I: Minimal or
specific forest practices that have no direct potential for damaging a public
resource and that may be conducted without submitting an application or a
notification except that when the regulating authority is transferred to a
local governmental entity, those Class I forest practices that involve timber
harvesting or road construction within "urban growth areas,"
designated pursuant to chapter 36.70A RCW, are processed as Class IV forest
practices, but are not subject to environmental review under chapter 43.21C
RCW;

Class II: Forest
practices which have a less than ordinary potential for damaging a public
resource that may be conducted without submitting an application and may begin
five calendar days, or such lesser time as the department may determine, after
written notification by the operator, in the manner, content, and form as
prescribed by the department, is received by the department. However, the work
may not begin until all forest practice fees required under RCW 76.09.065 have
been received by the department. Class II shall not include forest practices:

(a) On lands platted
after January 1, 1960, as provided in chapter 58.17 RCW or on lands that have
or are being converted to another use;

(b) Which require
approvals under the provisions of the hydraulics act, RCW ((75.20.100)) 77.55.100;

(c) Within
"shorelines of the state" as defined in RCW 90.58.030;

(d) Excluded from Class
II by the board; or

(e) Including timber
harvesting or road construction within "urban growth areas,"
designated pursuant to chapter 36.70A RCW, which are Class IV;

Class III: Forest
practices other than those contained in Class I, II, or IV. A Class III
application must be approved or disapproved by the department within thirty
calendar days from the date the department receives the application. However,
the applicant may not begin work on that forest practice until all forest
practice fees required under RCW 76.09.065 have been received by the
department;

Class IV: Forest
practices other than those contained in Class I or II: (a) On lands platted
after January 1, 1960, as provided in chapter 58.17 RCW, (b) on lands that have
or are being converted to another use, (c) on lands which, pursuant to RCW
76.09.070 as now or hereafter amended, are not to be reforested because of the
likelihood of future conversion to urban development, (d) ((except on those
lands)) involving timber harvesting or road construction on lands that are
contained within "urban growth areas," designated pursuant to chapter
36.70A RCW, except where the forest landowner provides: (i) A written
statement of intent signed by the forest landowner not to convert to a use
other than commercial forest product operations for ten years, accompanied by
either a written forest management plan acceptable to the department or
documentation that the land is enrolled under the provisions of chapter 84.33
RCW; or (ii) a conversion option harvest plan approved by the local
governmental entity and submitted to the department as part of the application,
and/or (e) which have a potential for a substantial impact on the environment
and therefore require an evaluation by the department as to whether or not a
detailed statement must be prepared pursuant to the state environmental policy
act, chapter 43.21C RCW. Such evaluation shall be made within ten days from
the date the department receives the application: PROVIDED, That nothing
herein shall be construed to prevent any local or regional governmental entity
from determining that a detailed statement must be prepared for an action pursuant
to a Class IV forest practice taken by that governmental entity concerning the
land on which forest practices will be conducted. A Class IV application must
be approved or disapproved by the department within thirty calendar days from
the date the department receives the application, unless the department
determines that a detailed statement must be made, in which case the
application must be approved or disapproved by the department within sixty
calendar days from the date the department receives the application, unless the
commissioner of public lands, through the promulgation of a formal order,
determines that the process cannot be completed within such period. However,
the applicant may not begin work on that forest practice until all forest practice
fees required under RCW 76.09.065 have been received by the department.

Forest practices under
Classes I, II, and III are exempt from the requirements for preparation of a
detailed statement under the state environmental policy act.

(2) Except for those
forest practices being regulated by local governmental entities as provided
elsewhere in this chapter, no Class II, Class III, or Class IV forest practice
shall be commenced or continued after January 1, 1975, unless the department
has received a notification with regard to a Class II forest practice or
approved an application with regard to a Class III or Class IV forest practice
containing all information required by RCW 76.09.060 as now or hereafter
amended. However, in the event forest practices regulations necessary for the
scheduled implementation of this chapter and RCW 90.48.420 have not been
adopted in time to meet such schedules, the department shall have the authority
to regulate forest practices and approve applications on such terms and
conditions consistent with this chapter and RCW 90.48.420 and the purposes and
policies of RCW 76.09.010 until applicable forest practices regulations are in
effect.

(3) Except for those
forest practices being regulated by local governmental entities as provided
elsewhere in this chapter, if a notification or application is delivered in
person to the department by the operator or the operator's agent, the
department shall immediately provide a dated receipt thereof. In all other
cases, the department shall immediately mail a dated receipt to the operator.

(4) Except for those
forest practices being regulated by local governmental entities as provided
elsewhere in this chapter, forest practices shall be conducted in accordance
with the forest practices regulations, orders and directives as authorized by
this chapter or the forest practices regulations, and the terms and conditions
of any approved applications.

(5) Except for those
forest practices being regulated by local governmental entities as provided
elsewhere in this chapter, the department of natural resources shall notify the
applicant in writing of either its approval of the application or its
disapproval of the application and the specific manner in which the application
fails to comply with the provisions of this section or with the forest
practices regulations. Except as provided otherwise in this section, if the
department fails to either approve or disapprove an application or any portion
thereof within the applicable time limit, the application shall be deemed
approved and the operation may be commenced: PROVIDED, That this provision
shall not apply to applications which are neither approved nor disapproved
pursuant to the provisions of subsection (7) of this section: PROVIDED,
FURTHER, That if seasonal field conditions prevent the department from being
able to properly evaluate the application, the department may issue an approval
conditional upon further review within sixty days: PROVIDED, FURTHER, That the
department shall have until April 1, 1975, to approve or disapprove an
application involving forest practices allowed to continue to April 1, 1975,
under the provisions of subsection (2) of this section. Upon receipt of any
notification or any satisfactorily completed application the department shall
in any event no later than two business days after such receipt transmit a copy
to the departments of ecology and fish and wildlife, and to the county, city,
or town in whose jurisdiction the forest practice is to be commenced. Any
comments by such agencies shall be directed to the department of natural
resources.

(6) For those forest
practices regulated by the board and the department, if the county, city, or
town believes that an application is inconsistent with this chapter, the forest
practices regulations, or any local authority consistent with RCW 76.09.240 as
now or hereafter amended, it may so notify the department and the applicant,
specifying its objections.

(7) For those forest
practices regulated by the board and the department, the department shall not
approve portions of applications to which a county, city, or town objects if:

(a) The department
receives written notice from the county, city, or town of such objections
within fourteen business days from the time of transmittal of the application
to the county, city, or town, or one day before the department acts on the
application, whichever is later; and

(b) The objections
relate to lands either:

(i) Platted after
January 1, 1960, as provided in chapter 58.17 RCW; or

(ii) On lands that have
or are being converted to another use.

The department shall
either disapprove those portions of such application or appeal the county,
city, or town objections to the appeals board. If the objections related to
subparagraphs (b)(i) and (ii) of this subsection are based on local authority
consistent with RCW 76.09.240 as now or hereafter amended, the department shall
disapprove the application until such time as the county, city, or town
consents to its approval or such disapproval is reversed on appeal. The
applicant shall be a party to all department appeals of county, city, or town
objections. Unless the county, city, or town either consents or has waived its
rights under this subsection, the department shall not approve portions of an
application affecting such lands until the minimum time for county, city, or
town objections has expired.

(8) For those forest
practices regulated by the board and the department, in addition to any rights
under the above paragraph, the county, city, or town may appeal any department
approval of an application with respect to any lands within its jurisdiction.
The appeals board may suspend the department's approval in whole or in part
pending such appeal where there exists potential for immediate and material
damage to a public resource.

(9) For those forest
practices regulated by the board and the department, appeals under this section
shall be made to the appeals board in the manner and time provided in RCW
76.09.220(8). In such appeals there shall be no presumption of correctness of
either the county, city, or town or the department position.

(10) For those forest
practices regulated by the board and the department, the department shall,
within four business days notify the county, city, or town of all
notifications, approvals, and disapprovals of an application affecting lands
within the county, city, or town, except to the extent the county, city, or
town has waived its right to such notice.

(11) For those forest
practices regulated by the board and the department, a county, city, or town
may waive in whole or in part its rights under this section, and may withdraw
or modify any such waiver, at any time by written notice to the department.

Sec. 2. RCW 76.09.240 and 1997 c
173 s 5 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) By December 31, ((2001))
2005, each county and each city shall adopt ordinances or promulgate
regulations setting standards for those Class IV forest practices regulated by
local government. The regulations shall: (a) Establish minimum standards for
Class IV forest practices; (b) set forth necessary administrative provisions;
and (c) establish procedures for the collection and administration of forest
practices and recording fees as set forth in this chapter.

(2) Class IV forest
practices regulations shall be administered and enforced by the counties and
cities that promulgate them.

(3) The forest
practices board shall continue to promulgate regulations and the department
shall continue to administer and enforce the regulations promulgated by the
board in each county and each city for all forest practices as provided in this
chapter until such time as, in the opinion of the department, the county or
city has promulgated forest practices regulations that meet the requirements as
set forth in this section and that meet or exceed the standards set forth by
the board in regulations in effect at the time the local regulations are adopted.
Regulations promulgated by the county or city thereafter shall be reviewed in
the usual manner set forth for county or city rules or ordinances. Amendments
to local ordinances must meet or exceed the forest practices rules at the time
the local ordinances are amended.

(a) Department review
of the initial regulations promulgated by a county or city shall take place
upon written request by the county or city. The department, in consultation
with the department of ecology, may approve or disapprove the regulations in
whole or in part.

(b) Until January 1, ((2002))
2006, the department shall provide technical assistance to all counties
or cities that have adopted forest practices regulations acceptable to the
department and that have assumed regulatory authority over all Class IV forest
practices within their jurisdiction.

(c) Decisions by the
department approving or disapproving the initial regulations promulgated by a
county or city may be appealed to the forest practices appeals board, which has
exclusive jurisdiction to review the department's approval or disapproval of
regulations promulgated by counties and cities.

(4) For those forest
practices over which the board and the department maintain regulatory authority
no county, city, municipality, or other local or regional governmental entity
shall adopt or enforce any law, ordinance, or regulation pertaining to forest
practices, except that to the extent otherwise permitted by law, such entities
may exercise any:

(a) Land use planning
or zoning authority: PROVIDED, That exercise of such authority may regulate
forest practices only: (i) Where the application submitted under RCW
76.09.060 as now or hereafter amended indicates that the lands have been or
will be converted to a use other than commercial forest product production; or
(ii) on lands which have been platted after January 1, 1960, as provided in
chapter 58.17 RCW: PROVIDED, That no permit system solely for forest practices
shall be allowed; that any additional or more stringent regulations shall not
be inconsistent with the forest practices regulations enacted under this
chapter; and such local regulations shall not unreasonably prevent timber
harvesting;

(b) Taxing powers;

(c) Regulatory
authority with respect to public health; and

(d) Authority
granted by chapter 90.58 RCW, the "Shoreline Management Act of 1971".

---
END ---