BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF
WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec.
1. A new section is added
to chapter 43.101 RCW to read as follows:

The
criminal justice training commission shall develop, in consultation with the
department of health, the board on law enforcement training standards and
education, and the board of correctional training standards and education, a
curriculum for a general understanding of the medical and physical
manifestations of diabetes and its implications for working with diabetics in
the course of law enforcement and correctional settings. The curriculum shall
be developed by December 1, 2002. The commission shall ensure that diabetes
training becomes an integral part of the training of law enforcement and
correctional personnel so as to incorporate sensitivity and awareness of this
disease into the daily activities of law enforcement and correctional
personnel.

--- END ---