BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF
WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec.
1. LEGISLATIVE FINDINGS OF
FACT AND STATEMENTS OF POLICY. The legislature finds and declares that:

(1) The people of the
state of Washington have a fundamental interest in developing harmonious and
cooperative labor relations within the public four-year institutions of higher
education.

(2) Teachers in the
public school system and instructors in the community colleges in the state
have been granted the opportunity to bargain collectively. It is desirable to
expand the jurisdiction of the public employment relations commission to cover
faculty in the state's public four-year institutions of higher education.

(3) It is the purpose
of this chapter to provide the means by which relations between the boards of
regents and trustees of the public four-year institutions of higher education
of the state of Washington and their faculty may assure that the
responsibilities and authorities granted to these institutions are carried out
in an atmosphere that permits the fullest participation by faculty in
determining the conditions of employment which affect them. It is the intent
of the legislature to accomplish this purpose by providing a uniform structure
for recognizing the right of faculty of the public four-year institutions of
higher education to engage in collective bargaining as provided in this
chapter, if they should so choose.

(4) It is the further
purpose of this chapter to provide orderly and clearly defined procedures for
collective bargaining and dispute resolution, and to define and prohibit
certain practices that are contrary to the public interest.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
2. EXERCISE OF FUNCTIONS OF
FACULTY IN SHARED GOVERNANCE‑-GUARANTEE OF ACADEMIC FREEDOM. (1) The
legislature recognizes that consultation and joint decision making between
administration and faculty is the long-accepted manner of governing public
four-year institutions of higher education and is essential to performing their
educational missions. The legislature declares that it is the purpose of this
chapter to both preserve and encourage that process. Nothing contained in this
chapter shall be construed to restrict, limit, or prohibit the exercise by the
faculty in any shared governance systems or practices with respect to policies
on academic and professional matters affecting the public four-year
institutions of higher education.

(2) It is the policy of
the state of Washington to encourage the pursuit of excellence in teaching,
research, and learning through the free exchange of ideas among the faculty,
students, and staff of its institutions. All parties subject to this chapter
shall respect and endeavor to preserve academic freedom.

(3) In the absence of a
valid collective bargaining agreement, and for matters upon which collective
bargaining is prohibited under section 4 of this act, the rules, regulations,
provisions, and procedures, policies, and practices manuals in public four-year
institutions of higher education shall govern relations between faculty and the
respective boards of regents and trustees.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
3. DEFINITIONS. The
definitions in this section apply throughout this chapter unless the context
clearly requires otherwise.

(1) "Faculty
governance system" means the internal organization that serves as the
faculty advisory body and is charged with the responsibility for recommending
policies, regulations, and rules for the college or university.

(2) "Grievance
arbitration" means a method to resolve disputes arising out of
interpretations or application of the terms of an agreement under which the
parties to a controversy must accept the decision of an impartial person or
persons.

(3) "Collective
bargaining" and "bargaining" mean the performance of the mutual
obligation of the representatives of the employer and the exclusive bargaining
representative to meet at reasonable times to bargain in good faith in an
effort to reach agreement with respect to wages, hours, and other terms and
conditions of employment. A written contract incorporating any agreements
reached must be executed if requested by either party. The obligation to
bargain does not compel either party to agree to a proposal or to make a
concession.

In the event of a
dispute between an employer and an exclusive bargaining representative over the
matters that are terms and conditions of employment, the commission shall
decide which items are mandatory subjects for bargaining, subject to section 4
of this act.

(4)
"Commission" means the public employment relations commission
established pursuant to RCW 41.58.010.

(5) "Faculty"
means employees who, at a public four-year institution of higher education, are
designated with faculty status or who perform faculty duties as defined through
policies established by the faculty governance system, excluding casual or
temporary employees, administrators, confidential employees, graduate student
employees, postdoctoral and clinical employees, and employees subject to
chapter 41.06 or 41.56 RCW.

(6) "Employee
organization" means any organization that includes as its members faculty
of the employer and that has as one of its purposes representation of faculty
under this chapter. A faculty governance system is not an employee
organization as defined in this subsection.

(7)
"Employer" means the board of regents or the board of trustees of a
public four-year institution of higher education.

(8) "Exclusive
bargaining representative" means any employee organization that has been
determined by the commission to represent all of the faculty members of the
bargaining unit as required in section 6 of this act.

(9)
"Administrator" means deans, associate and assistant deans,
vice-provosts, vice‑presidents, the provost, chancellors, vice‑chancellors,
the president, and faculty members who exercise managerial or supervisory
authority over other faculty members.

(10) "Confidential
employee" means (a) a person who participates directly on behalf of an
employer in the formulation of labor relations policy, the preparation for or
conduct of collective bargaining, or the administration of a collective
bargaining agreement, if the role of the person is not merely routine or
clerical in nature but calls for the consistent exercise of independent
judgment; and (b) a person who assists and acts in a confidential capacity to a
person in (a) of this subsection.

(11) "Bargaining
unit" includes all faculty members of all campuses of each of the colleges
and universities. Only one bargaining unit is allowable for faculty of each
employer, and that unit must contain all faculty members from all schools,
colleges, and campuses of the employer.

(12) "Public
four-year institutions of higher education" means the University of
Washington, Washington State University, Eastern Washington University, Western
Washington University, Central Washington University, and The Evergreen State
College.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
4. SCOPE OF BARGAINING. (1)
Prohibited subjects of bargaining include but are not limited to the following:

(a) Consideration of
the merits, necessity, or organization of any service, activity, or program
established by law or resolution of the employer, except for the terms and
conditions of employment of faculty members who may be affected by such
service, activity, or program.

(b) The amount of any
fees that are not a term or condition of employment.

(c) Admission requirements
for students, conditions for the award of certificates and degrees, and the
content, methods, supervision, and evaluation of courses, curricula, and
research programs.

(2) Permissive subjects
of bargaining include, but are not limited to, criteria and standards to be
used for the appointment, promotion, evaluation, and tenure of faculty.

(3) Nothing in this
section shall be construed to limit the right of the employer to consult with
any employee or faculty governance system on any matter outside the scope of
bargaining.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
5. RIGHT TO ORGANIZE OR
REFRAIN FROM ORGANIZING. Faculty members have the right to self-organization, to
form, join, or assist employee organizations, and to bargain collectively
through exclusive bargaining representatives of their own choosing, and also
have the right to refrain from any or all of these activities except to the
extent that faculty members may be required to make payments to an exclusive
bargaining representative or charitable organization under a union security
provision authorized in this chapter.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
6. EXCLUSIVE BARGAINING
REPRESENTATIVES‑-DUTY OF FAIR REPRESENTATION. The employee organization
which has been determined by the commission to be the exclusive bargaining
representative of a bargaining unit shall be required to represent all the
faculty members within the bargaining unit without regard to membership in that
employee organization: PROVIDED, That any faculty member may at any time
present his or her complaints or concerns to the employer and have such
complaints or concerns adjusted without intervention of the exclusive bargaining
representative, as long as the exclusive bargaining representative has been
given an opportunity to be present at the adjustment and to make its views
known, and as long as the adjustment is not inconsistent with the terms of a
collective bargaining agreement then in effect.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
7. REPRESENTATION CASE
PROCEDURE. The commission shall certify exclusive bargaining representatives
in accordance with the procedures specified in this section.

(1) No question
concerning representation may be raised within one year following issuance of a
certification under this section.

(2) If there is a valid
collective bargaining agreement in effect, no question concerning
representation may be raised except during the period not more than ninety nor
less than sixty days prior to the expiration date of the agreement: PROVIDED,
That in the event a valid collective bargaining agreement, together with any
renewals or extensions thereof, has been or will be in existence for more than
three years, then a question concerning representation may be
raised not more than ninety nor less than sixty days prior to the third
anniversary date or any subsequent anniversary date of the agreement; and if
the exclusive bargaining representative is removed as the result of such
procedure, the collective bargaining agreement shall be deemed to be terminated
as of the date of the certification or the anniversary date following the
filing of the petition, whichever is later.

(3) An employee
organization seeking certification as exclusive bargaining representative of a
bargaining unit, or faculty members seeking decertification of their exclusive
bargaining representative, must make a confidential showing to the commission
of credible evidence demonstrating that at least thirty percent of the faculty
in the bargaining unit are in support of the petition. The petition must
indicate the name, address, and telephone number of any employee organization
known to claim an interest in the bargaining unit.

(4) A petition filed by
an employer must be supported by credible evidence demonstrating the good faith
basis on which the employer claims the existence of a question concerning the
representation of its faculty.

(5) Any employee
organization which makes a confidential showing to the commission of credible
evidence demonstrating that it has the support of at least ten percent of the
faculty in the bargaining unit involved is entitled to intervene in proceedings
under this section and to have its name listed as a choice on the ballot in an
election conducted by the commission.

(6) The commission
shall determine any question concerning representation by conducting a secret
ballot election among the faculty members in the bargaining unit, except under
the following circumstances:

(a) If only one
employee organization is seeking certification as exclusive bargaining
representative of a bargaining unit for which there is no incumbent exclusive
bargaining representative, the commission may, upon the concurrence of the
employer and the employee organization, determine the question concerning
representation by conducting a cross-check comparing the employee
organization's membership records or bargaining authorization cards against the
employment records of the employer; or

(b) If the commission
determines that a serious unfair labor practice has been committed which
interfered with the election process and precludes the holding of a fair
election, the commission may determine the question concerning representation
by conducting a cross-check comparing the employee organization's membership
records or bargaining authorization cards against the employment records of the
employer.

(7) The representation
election ballot must contain a choice for each employee organization qualifying
under subsection (3) or (5) of this section, together with a choice for no
representation. The representation election shall be determined by the
majority of the valid ballots cast. If there are three or more choices on the
ballot and none of the three or more choices receives a majority of the valid
ballots cast, a runoff election shall be conducted between the two choices
receiving the highest and second highest numbers of votes.

(8) The commission
shall certify as the exclusive bargaining representative the employee
organization that has been determined to represent a majority of faculty
members in a bargaining unit.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
8. BARGAINING UNIT
DETERMINATION. In any dispute concerning membership in the bargaining unit or
the allocation of employees or positions to a bargaining unit, the commission,
after a hearing or hearings, shall determine the dispute.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
9. COMMISSION‑-MEDIATION
ACTIVITIES‑-OTHER DISPUTE RESOLUTION PROCEDURES AUTHORIZED. (1) The
commission shall conduct mediation activities upon the request of either party
as a means of assisting in the settlement of unresolved matters considered
under this chapter.

(2) If any matter being
jointly considered by the exclusive bargaining representative and the board of
regents or trustees is not settled by the means provided in this chapter,
either party may request the assistance and advice of the commission. Nothing
in this section prohibits an employer and an employee organization from
agreeing to substitute, at their own expense, some other impasse procedure or
other means of resolving matters considered under this chapter.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
10. PROVISIONS RELATING TO
COMPENSATION‑-RESTRICTIONS. (1) Except as provided in subsection (2) of
this section, provisions of collective bargaining agreements relating to
compensation shall not exceed the amount or percentage established by the
legislature in the appropriations act. If any compensation provision is
affected by subsequent modification of the appropriations act by the
legislature, both parties shall immediately enter into collective bargaining
for the sole purpose of arriving at a mutually agreed upon replacement for the
affected provision.

(2) An employer may
provide additional compensation to faculty that exceeds that provided by the
legislature.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
11. NEGOTIATED AGREEMENTS‑-PROCEDURES
FOR GRIEVANCE ARBITRATION. A collective bargaining agreement negotiated under
this chapter may include procedures for final and binding grievance arbitration
of the disputes arising about the interpretation or application of the
agreement.

(1) The parties to a
collective bargaining agreement may agree on one or more permanent umpires to
serve as arbitrator, or may agree on any impartial person to serve as
arbitrator, or may agree to select arbitrators from any source available to
them, including federal and private agencies, in addition to the staff and
dispute resolution panel maintained by the commission.

(2) An arbitrator may
require any person to attend as a witness, and to bring with him or her any
book, record, document, or other evidence. Subpoenas shall issue and be signed
by the arbitrator and shall be served in the same manner as subpoenas to
testify before a court of record in this state. The fees for such attendance
shall be paid by the party requesting issuance of the subpoena and shall be the
same as the fees of witnesses in the superior court. If any person so summoned
to testify refuses or neglects to obey such subpoena, upon petition authorized
by the arbitrator, the superior court may compel the attendance of such person
before the arbitrator, or punish the person for contempt in the same manner
provided for the attendance of witnesses or the punishment of them in the
courts of this state.

(3) The arbitrator
shall appoint a time and place for the hearing and notify the parties thereof,
and may adjourn the hearing from time to time as may be necessary, and, on
application of either party and for good cause, may postpone the hearing to a
time not extending beyond a date fixed by the collective bargaining agreement
for making the award. The arbitrator has the power to administer oaths. The
arbitration award shall be in writing and signed by the arbitrator or a
majority of the members of the arbitration panel. The arbitrator shall,
promptly upon its rendition, serve a true copy of the award on each of the
parties or their attorneys.

(4) If a party to a
collective bargaining agreement negotiated under this chapter refuses to submit
a grievance for arbitration, the other party to the collective bargaining
agreement may invoke the jurisdiction of the superior court for any county in
which the labor dispute exists, and such court has jurisdiction to issue an
order compelling arbitration. The commission, on its own motion, may invoke
the jurisdiction of the superior court where a strike or lockout is in
existence. Arbitration shall be ordered if the grievance states a claim which
on its face is covered by the collective bargaining agreement, and doubts as to
the coverage of the arbitration clause shall be resolved in favor of arbitration.
Disputes concerning compliance with grievance procedures shall be reserved for
determination by the arbitrator.

(5) If a party to a
collective bargaining agreement negotiated under this chapter refuses to comply
with the award of an arbitrator determining a grievance arising under such
collective bargaining agreement, the other party to the collective bargaining
agreement, or any affected employee, may invoke the jurisdiction of the
superior court for any county in which the labor dispute exists, and such court
has jurisdiction to issue an order enforcing the arbitration award. The
commission, on its own motion, may invoke the jurisdiction of the superior
court where a strike or lockout is in existence. The court shall not
substitute its judgment for that of the arbitrator and shall enforce any
arbitration award which is based on the collective bargaining agreement, except
that an arbitration award shall not be enforced and a new arbitration
proceeding may be ordered:

(a) If the arbitration
award was procured by corruption, fraud, or undue means;

(b) If there was
evident partiality or corruption in the arbitrator or arbitrators;

(c) If the arbitrator
or arbitrators were guilty of misconduct, in refusing to postpone a hearing
upon sufficient cause shown, or in refusing to hear evidence pertinent and
material to the controversy, or of any other misbehavior by which the rights of
any party have been prejudiced; or

(d) If the arbitrator
or arbitrators have exceeded their powers, or so imperfectly executed them that
a final and definite award on the subject matter was not made, in which event
the court also has discretion to remand the matter to the arbitrator or
arbitrators who issued the defective award.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
12. COLLECTIVE BARGAINING
AGREEMENT‑-EXCLUSIVE BARGAINING REPRESENTATIVE‑-UNION SECURITY
PROVISIONS‑-DUES AND FEES. (1) Upon filing with the employer the
voluntary written authorization of a bargaining unit faculty member under this
chapter, the employee organization which is the exclusive bargaining
representative of the bargaining unit shall have the right to have deducted
from the salary of the bargaining unit faculty member the periodic dues and
initiation fees uniformly required as a condition of acquiring or retaining
membership in the exclusive bargaining representative. Such employee
authorization shall not be irrevocable for a period of more than one year.
Such dues and fees shall be deducted from the pay of all faculty members who
have given authorization for such deduction, and shall be transmitted by the
employer to the employee organization or to the depository designated by the
employee organization.

(2) A collective
bargaining agreement may include union security provisions, but not a closed
shop. If an agency shop or other union security provision is agreed to, the
employer shall enforce any such provision by deductions from the salary of
bargaining unit faculty members affected thereby and shall transmit such funds
to the employee organization or to the depository designated by the employee
organization.

(3) A faculty member
who is covered by a union security provision and who asserts a right of
nonassociation based on bona fide religious tenets or teachings of a church or
religious body of which such faculty member is a member shall pay to a
nonreligious charity or other charitable organization an amount of money
equivalent to the periodic dues and initiation fees uniformly required as a
condition of acquiring or retaining membership in the exclusive bargaining
representative. The charity shall be agreed upon by the faculty member and the
employee organization to which such faculty member would otherwise pay the dues
and fees. The faculty member shall furnish written proof that such payments
have been made. If the faculty member and the employee organization do not
reach agreement on such matter, the dispute shall be submitted to the
commission for determination.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
13. UNFAIR LABOR PRACTICES.
(1) It is an unfair labor practice for an employer to:

(a) Interfere with,
restrain, or coerce faculty members in the exercise of the rights guaranteed by
this chapter;

(b) Dominate or
interfere with the formation or administration of any employee organization or
contribute financial or other support to it: PROVIDED, That subject to rules
adopted by the commission, an employer is not prohibited from permitting
faculty members to confer with it or its representatives or agents during
working hours without loss of time or pay;

(c) Encourage or
discourage membership in any employee organization by discrimination in regard
to hire, tenure of employment, or any term or condition of employment;

(d) Discharge or
discriminate otherwise against a faculty member because that faculty member has
filed charges or given testimony under this chapter;

(e) Refuse to bargain
collectively with the exclusive bargaining representative of its faculty.

(2) It is an unfair
labor practice for an employee organization to:

(a) Restrain or coerce
a faculty member in the exercise of the rights guaranteed by this chapter:
PROVIDED, That this subsection does not impair the rights of (i) an employee
organization to prescribe its own rules with respect to the acquisition or retention
of membership in the employee organization or (ii) to the rights of an employer
in the selection of its representatives for the purpose of bargaining or the
adjustment of grievances;

(b) Cause or attempt to
cause an employer to discriminate against a faculty member in violation of
subsection (1)(c) of this section;

(c) Discriminate
against a faculty member because that faculty member has filed charges or given
testimony under this chapter;

(d) Refuse to bargain
collectively with an employer.

(3) The expressing of
any view, arguments, or opinion, or the dissemination thereof to the public,
whether in written, printed, graphic, or visual form, shall not constitute or
be evidence of an unfair labor practice under this chapter, if such expression
contains no threat of reprisal or force or promise of benefit.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
14. COMMISSION TO PREVENT
UNFAIR LABOR PRACTICES‑-SCOPE. (1) The commission is empowered to
prevent any person from engaging in any unfair labor practice as defined in
section 13 of this act: PROVIDED, That a complaint shall not be processed for
any unfair labor practice occurring more than six months before the filing of
the complaint with the commission. This power shall not be affected by any
other means of adjustment or prevention that has been or may be established by
agreement, law, equity or otherwise.

(2) If the commission
determines that any person has engaged in or is engaging in any such unfair
labor practices as defined in section 13 of this act, then the commission shall
issue and cause to be served upon such person an order requiring such person to
cease and desist from such unfair labor practice, and to take such affirmative
action as will effectuate the purposes and policy of this chapter, such as the
payment of damages and/or the reinstatement of faculty members.

(3) The commission may
petition the superior court for the county in which the main office of the
employer is located or wherein the person who has engaged or is engaging in
such unfair labor practice resides or transacts business, for the enforcement
of its order and for appropriate temporary relief.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
15. RULES ADOPTION. The
commission is authorized from time to time to make, amend, and rescind, in the
manner prescribed by the administrative procedure act, chapter 34.05 RCW, such
rules and regulations as may be necessary to carry out the provisions of this
chapter.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
16. STRIKES AND LOCKOUTS
PROHIBITED‑-VIOLATIONS‑-REMEDIES. The right of faculty to engage
in any strike is prohibited. The right of a board of regents or trustees to
engage in any lockout is prohibited. Should either a strike or lockout occur,
the representative of the faculty or board of regents or trustees may invoke
the jurisdiction of the superior court in the county in which the labor dispute
exists, and such court has jurisdiction to issue an appropriate order against
either or both parties. In fashioning an order, the court shall take into
consideration not only the elements necessary for injunctive relief but also
the purpose and goals of this chapter and any mitigating factors such as the
commission of an unfair labor practice by either party.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
17. STATE ADMINISTRATIVE
PROCEDURE ACT NOT TO AFFECT. Contracts or agreements, or any provision
thereof, entered into between boards of regents or trustees and exclusive
bargaining representatives pursuant to this chapter are not affected by or
subject to chapter 34.05 RCW.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
18. SEVERABILITY. If any
provision of this act or its application to any person or circumstance is held
invalid, the remainder of the act or the application of the provision to other
persons or circumstances is not affected.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
19. RETROACTIVE ACCRUAL OF
BENEFITS AND SALARIES. Whenever a collective bargaining agreement between an
employer and an exclusive bargaining representative is concluded after the
termination date of the previous collective bargaining agreement between the same
parties, the effective date of the collective bargaining agreement may be the
day after the termination date of the previous collective bargaining agreement,
and all benefits included in the new collective bargaining agreement, including
wage or salary increases, may accrue beginning with the effective date as
established by this section.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
20. Nothing in this chapter
shall be construed to annul, modify, or preclude the renewal or continuation of
any lawful agreement entered into before the effective date of this section
between an employer and an employee organization covering wages, hours, and
terms and conditions of employment.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
21. Except as otherwise expressly
provided in this chapter, this chapter shall not be construed to deny or
otherwise abridge any rights, privileges, or benefits granted by law to
employees. This chapter shall not be construed to interfere with the
responsibilities and rights of the board of regents or board of trustees as
specified by federal and state law.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
22. Section captions used in
this act are not any part of the law.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
23. This act takes effect
October 1, 2002.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 24. Sections 1 through 23 of
this act constitute a new chapter in Title 41 RCW.

---
END ---