BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF
WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec.
1. The legislature finds
that the United States congress has enacted the mobile telecommunications
sourcing act for the purpose of establishing uniform nationwide sourcing rules
for state and local taxation of mobile telecommunications services. The legislature
desires to adopt implementing legislation governing taxation by the state and
by affected local taxing jurisdictions within the state. The legislature
recognizes that the federal act is intended to provide a clarification of
sourcing rules that is revenue-neutral among the states, and that the
clarifications required by the federal act are likely in fact to be
revenue-neutral at the state level. The legislature also desires to take
advantage of a provision of the federal act that allows a state with a
generally applicable business and occupation tax, such as this state, to make
certain of the uniform sourcing rules elective for such tax.

Sec. 2. RCW 82.04.065 and 1997 c
304 s 5 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) "Competitive
telephone service" means the providing by any person of telecommunications
equipment or apparatus, or service related to that equipment or apparatus such
as repair or maintenance service, if the equipment or apparatus is of a type
which can be provided by persons that are not subject to regulation as
telephone companies under Title 80 RCW and for which a separate charge is made.

(2) "Network
telephone service" means the providing by any person of access to a ((local))
telephone network, ((local)) telephone network switching service, toll
service, or coin telephone services, or the providing of telephonic, video,
data, or similar communication or transmission for hire, via a ((local))
telephone network, toll line or channel, cable, microwave, or similar
communication or transmission system. (("Network telephone
service" includes interstate service, including toll service, originating
from or received on telecommunications equipment or apparatus in this state if
the charge for the service is billed to a person in this state.))
"Network telephone service" includes the provision of transmission to
and from the site of an internet provider via a ((local)) telephone
network, toll line or channel, cable, microwave, or similar communication or
transmission system. "Network telephone service" does not include
the providing of competitive telephone service, the providing of cable
television service, the providing of broadcast services by radio or television
stations, nor the provision of internet service as defined in RCW 82.04.297,
including the reception of dial-in connection, provided at the site of the
internet service provider.

(3) "Telephone
service" means competitive telephone service or network telephone service,
or both, as defined in subsections (1) and (2) of this section.

(4) "Telephone
business" means the business of providing network telephone service, as
defined in subsection (2) of this section. It includes cooperative or farmer
line telephone companies or associations operating an exchange.

(5) "Charges
for mobile telecommunications services" means any charge for, or
associated with, the provision of commercial mobile radio service, as defined
in section 20.3, Title 47 C.F.R. as in effect on June 1, 1999, or any charge
for, or associated with, a service provided as an adjunct to a commercial
mobile radio service, regardless of whether individual transmissions originate
or terminate within the licensed service area of the mobile telecommunications
service provider.

(6)
"Customer" means: (a) The person or entity that contracts with the
home service provider for mobile telecommunications services; or (b) the end
user of the mobile telecommunications service, if the end user of mobile
telecommunications services is not the contracting party, but this subsection
(6)(b) applies only for the purpose of determining the place of primary use.
The term does not include a reseller of mobile telecommunications service, or a
serving carrier under an arrangement to serve the customer outside the home service
provider's licensed service area.

(7) "Designated
data base provider" means a person representing all the political
subdivisions of the state that is:

(a) Responsible for
providing an electronic data base prescribed in 4 U.S.C. Sec. 119(a) if the state
has not provided an electronic data base; and

(b) Approved by
municipal and county associations or leagues of the state whose responsibility
it would otherwise be to provide a data base prescribed by 4 U.S.C. Secs. 116
through 126.

(8) "Enhanced
zip code" means a United States postal zip code of nine or more digits.

(9) "Home
service provider" means the facilities-based carrier or reseller with whom
the customer contracts for the provision of mobile telecommunications services.

(10) "Licensed
service area" means the geographic area in which the home service provider
is authorized by law or contract to provide commercial mobile radio service to
the customer.

(11) "Mobile
telecommunications service" means commercial mobile radio service, as
defined in section 20.3, Title 47 C.F.R. as in effect on June 1, 1999.

(12) "Mobile
telecommunications service provider" means a home service provider or a
serving carrier.

(13) "Place of
primary use" means the street address representative of where the customer's
use of the mobile telecommunications service primarily occurs, which must be:

(a) The residential
street address or the primary business street address of the customer; and

(b) Within the
licensed service area of the home service provider.

(14) "Prepaid
telephone calling service" means the right to purchase exclusively
telecommunications services that must be paid for in advance, that enables the
origination of calls using an access number, authorization code, or both,
whether manually or electronically dialed, if the remaining amount of units of
service that have been prepaid is known by the provider of the prepaid service
on a continuous basis.

(15)
"Reseller" means a provider who purchases telecommunications services
from another telecommunications service provider and then resells, uses as a
component part of, or integrates the purchased services into a mobile
telecommunications service. "Reseller" does not include a serving
carrier with whom a home service provider arranges for the services to its
customers outside the home service provider's licensed service area.

(16) "Serving
carrier" means a facilities-based carrier providing mobile
telecommunications service to a customer outside a home service provider's or
reseller's licensed service area.

(17) "Taxing
jurisdiction" means any of the several states, the District of Columbia,
or any territory or possession of the United States, any municipality, city,
county, township, parish, transportation district, or assessment jurisdiction,
or other political subdivision within the territorial limits of the United
States with the authority to impose a tax, charge, or fee.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
3. A new section is added
to chapter 82.04 RCW to read as follows:

A telephone business
other than a mobile telecommunications service provider must calculate gross
proceeds of sales by including all charges for network telephone services
originating from or received on telecommunications equipment or apparatus in
this state if the charge for the service is billed to a person in this state.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
4. A new section is added
to chapter 82.04 RCW to read as follows:

(1) Unless a mobile
telecommunications service provider elects to be taxed under subsection (2) of
this section, the mobile telecommunications service provider must calculate
gross proceeds of sales by reporting all sales to, or sales between carriers
for, customers with a place of primary use within this state, regardless of
where the mobile telecommunications services originate, are received, or are
billed, consistent with the mobile telecommunications sourcing act, P.L.
106-252, 4 U.S.C. Secs. 116 through 126.

(2) A mobile
telecommunications service provider may elect to calculate gross proceeds of
sales by including all charges for mobile telecommunications services provided
to all consumers, whether the consumers are the mobile telecommunications
service provider's customers or not, if the services originate from or are
received on telecommunications equipment or apparatus in this state and are
billed to a person in this state.

(3) If a mobile
telecommunications service provider elects to be taxed under subsection (2) of
this section, the mobile telecommunications service provider must provide
written notice of the election before the effective date of this section, or
before the beginning date of any tax year thereafter in which it wishes to
change its reporting and make this election.

(4) The department may
provide, by rule, for formulary reporting as necessary to implement this
section.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
5. A new section is added
to chapter 82.08 RCW to read as follows:

For the purposes of
this chapter, mobile telecommunications services are deemed to have occurred at
the customer's place of primary use, regardless of where the mobile
telecommunications services originate, terminate, or pass through, consistent
with the mobile telecommunications sourcing act, P.L. 106-252, 4 U.S.C. Secs.
116 through 126. The definitions in RCW 82.04.065 apply to this section.

Sec. 6. RCW 82.08.0289 and 1983
2nd ex.s. c 3 s 30 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) The tax levied by
RCW 82.08.020 shall not apply to sales of:

(a) Network telephone
service, other than toll service, to residential customers((.));

(b) Network telephone
service which is paid for by inserting coins in coin-operated telephones((.));

(c) Mobile
telecommunications services, including any toll service, provided to a customer
whose place of primary use is outside this state.

(2) ((As used in
this section:)) The definitions in RCW 82.04.065, as well as the
definitions in this subsection, apply to this section.

(a) (("Network
telephone service" has the meaning given in RCW 82.04.065.

(b))) "Residential customer" means an
individual subscribing to a residential class of telephone service.

(((c))) (b)
"Toll service" does not include customer access line charges for
access to a toll calling network.

Sec. 7. RCW 82.14.020 and 2001 c
186 s 3 are each amended to read as follows:

For purposes of this
chapter:

(1) A retail sale
consisting solely of the sale of tangible personal property shall be deemed to
have occurred at the retail outlet at or from which delivery is made to the
consumer;

(2) A retail sale
consisting essentially of the performance of personal business or professional
services shall be deemed to have occurred at the place at which such services
were primarily performed, except that for the performance of a tow truck
service, as defined in RCW 46.55.010, the retail sale shall be deemed to have
occurred at the place of business of the operator of the tow truck service;

(3) A retail sale
consisting of the rental of tangible personal property shall be deemed to have
occurred (a) in the case of a rental involving periodic rental payments, at the
((primary)) place of primary use by the lessee during the period
covered by each payment, or (b) in all other cases, at the place of first use
by the lessee;

(4) A retail sale
within the scope of RCW 82.04.050(2), and a retail sale of taxable personal
property to be installed by the seller shall be deemed to have occurred at the
place where the labor and services involved were primarily performed;

(5)(a) A retail
sale consisting of the providing to a consumer of telephone service, as defined
in RCW 82.04.065, other than a sale of tangible personal property under
subsection (1) of this section or a rental of tangible personal property under
subsection (3) of this section or a sale of mobile telecommunications
services, shall be deemed to have occurred at the situs of the telephone or
other instrument through which the telephone service is rendered;

(b) A retail sale
consisting of the providing to a consumer of mobile telecommunications services
is deemed to have occurred at the customer's place of primary use, regardless
of where the mobile telecommunications services originate, terminate, or pass
through, consistent with the mobile telecommunications sourcing act, P.L.
106-252, 4 U.S.C. Secs. 116 through 126;

(6) A retail sale of
linen and uniform supply services is deemed to occur as provided in RCW
82.08.0202;

(7) "City"
means a city or town;

(8) The meaning
ascribed to words and phrases in chapters 82.04, 82.08 and 82.12 RCW, as now or
hereafter amended, insofar as applicable, shall have full force and effect with
respect to taxes imposed under authority of this chapter;

(9) "Taxable
event" shall mean any retail sale, or any use of an article of tangible
personal property, upon which a state tax is imposed pursuant to chapter 82.08
or 82.12 RCW, as they now exist or may hereafter be amended: PROVIDED,
HOWEVER, That the term shall not include a retail sale taxable pursuant to RCW
82.08.150, as now or hereafter amended;

(10) "Treasurer or
other legal depository" shall mean the treasurer or legal depository of a
county or city.

Sec. 8. RCW 82.14B.030 and 1998
c 304 s 3 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) The legislative
authority of a county may impose a county enhanced 911 excise tax on the use of
switched access lines in an amount not exceeding fifty cents per month for each
switched access line. The amount of tax shall be uniform for each switched
access line. Each county shall provide notice of such tax to all local
exchange companies serving in the county at least sixty days in advance of the
date on which the first payment is due.

(2) The legislative
authority of a county may also impose a county 911 excise tax on the use of
radio access lines located within the county in an amount not exceeding
twenty-five cents per month for each radio access line. The amount of tax
shall be uniform for each radio access line. The location of a radio access
line is the customer's place of primary use as defined in RCW 82.04.065.
The county shall provide notice of such tax to all radio communications service
companies serving in the county at least sixty days in advance of the date on
which the first payment is due. Any county imposing this tax shall include in
its ordinance a refund mechanism whereby the amount of any tax ordered to be
refunded by the judgment of a court of record, or as a result of the resolution
of any appeal therefrom, shall be refunded to the radio communications service
company or local exchange company that collected the tax, and those companies
shall reimburse the subscribers who paid the tax. The ordinance shall further
provide that to the extent the subscribers who paid the tax cannot be
identified or located, the tax paid by those subscribers shall be returned to
the county.

(3) A state enhanced
911 excise tax is imposed on all switched access lines in the state. The
amount of tax shall not exceed twenty cents per month for each switched access
line. The tax shall be uniform for each switched access line. The tax imposed
under this subsection shall be remitted to the department of revenue by local
exchange companies on a tax return provided by the department. Tax proceeds
shall be deposited by the treasurer in the enhanced 911 account created in RCW
38.52.540.

(4) By August 31st of
each year the state enhanced 911 coordinator shall recommend the level for the
next year of the state enhanced 911 excise tax, based on a systematic cost and
revenue analysis, to the utilities and transportation commission. The
commission shall by the following October 31st determine the level of the state
enhanced 911 excise tax for the following year.

Sec. 9. RCW 35.21.714 and 1989 c
103 s 1 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) Any city
which imposes a license fee or tax upon the business activity of engaging in
the telephone business((, as defined in RCW 82.04.065,)) which is
measured by gross receipts or gross income may impose the fee or tax, if it
desires, on one hundred percent of the total gross revenue derived from
intrastate toll telephone services subject to the fee or tax: PROVIDED, That
the city shall not impose the fee or tax on that portion of network telephone
service((, as defined in RCW 82.04.065,)) which represents charges to
another telecommunications company, as defined in RCW 80.04.010, for connecting
fees, switching charges, or carrier access charges relating to intrastate toll
telephone services, or for access to, or charges for, interstate services, or
charges for network telephone service that is purchased for the purpose of
resale, or charges for mobile telecommunications services provided to
customers whose place of primary use is not within the city.

(2) Any city that
imposes a license tax or fee under subsection (1) of this section has the
authority, rights, and obligations of a taxing jurisdiction as provided in
sections 11 through 15 of this act.

(3) The definitions
in RCW 82.04.065 apply to this section.

Sec. 10. RCW 35A.82.060 and 1989
c 103 s 3 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) Any code
city which imposes a license fee or tax upon the business activity of engaging
in the telephone business((, as defined in RCW 82.04.065,)) which is
measured by gross receipts or gross income may impose the fee or tax, if it
desires, on one hundred percent of the total gross revenue derived from
intrastate toll telephone services subject to the fee or tax: PROVIDED, That
the city shall not impose the fee or tax on that portion of network telephone
service((, as defined in RCW 82.04.065,)) which represents charges to
another telecommunications company, as defined in RCW 80.04.010, for connecting
fees, switching charges, or carrier access charges relating to intrastate toll
telephone services, or for access to, or charges for, interstate services, or
charges for network telephone service that is purchased for the purpose of
resale, or charges for mobile telecommunications services provided to
customers whose place of primary use is not within the city.

(2) Any city that
imposes a license tax or fee under subsection (1) of this section has the
authority, rights, and obligations of a taxing jurisdiction as provided in
sections 11 through 15 of this act.

(3) The definitions
in RCW 82.04.065 apply to this section.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
11. A new section is added
to chapter 82.32 RCW to read as follows:

(1)(a) The department
may provide an electronic data base as described in this section to a mobile
telecommunications service provider, or if the department does not provide an electronic
data base to mobile telecommunications service providers, then the designated
data base provider may provide an electronic data base to a mobile
telecommunications service provider.

(b)(i) An electronic
data base, whether provided by the department or the designated data base
provider, shall be provided in a format approved by the American national
standards institute's accredited standards committee X12, that after allowing
for de minimis deviations, designates for each street address in the state,
including to the extent practicable, any multiple postal street addresses
applicable to one street location, the appropriate taxing jurisdictions, and
the appropriate code for each taxing jurisdiction, for each level of taxing
jurisdiction, identified by one nationwide standard numeric code.

(ii) An electronic data
base shall also provide the appropriate code for each street address with
respect to political subdivisions that are not taxing jurisdictions when
reasonably needed to determine the proper taxing jurisdiction.

(iii) The nationwide
standard numeric codes shall contain the same number of numeric digits with
each digit or combination of digits referring to the same level of taxing
jurisdiction throughout the United States using a format similar to FIPS 55-3
or other appropriate standard approved by the federation of tax administrators
and the multistate tax commission, or their successors. Each address shall be
provided in standard postal format.

(2) The department or
designated data base provider, as applicable, that provides or maintains an
electronic data base described in subsection (1) of this section shall provide
notice of the availability of the then-current electronic data base, and any
subsequent revisions, by publication in the manner normally employed for the
publication of informational tax, charge, or fee notices to taxpayers in the
state.

(3) A mobile
telecommunications service provider using the data contained in an electronic
data base described in subsection (1) of this section shall be held harmless
from any tax, charge, or fee liability that otherwise would be due solely as a
result of any error or omission in the data base provided by the department or
designated data base provider. The mobile telecommunications service provider
shall reflect changes made to the data base during a calendar quarter not later
than thirty days after the end of the calendar quarter if the department or
designated data base provider, as applicable, has issued notice of the
availability of an electronic data base reflecting the changes under subsection
(2) of this section.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
12. A new section is added
to chapter 82.32 RCW to read as follows:

(1) If neither the
department nor the designated data base provider provides an electronic data
base under section 11 of this act, a mobile telecommunications service provider
shall be held harmless from any tax, charge, or fee liability in any taxing
jurisdiction in this state that otherwise would be due solely as a result of an
assignment of a street address to an incorrect taxing jurisdiction if, subject
to section 13 of this act, the home service provider employs an enhanced zip
code to assign each street address to a specific taxing jurisdiction for each
level of taxing jurisdiction and exercises due diligence at each level of
taxing jurisdiction to ensure that each street address is assigned to the
correct taxing jurisdiction. If an enhanced zip code overlaps boundaries of
taxing jurisdictions of the same level, the home service provider must
designate one specific jurisdiction within the enhanced zip code for use in
taxing the activity for such enhanced zip code for each level of taxing
jurisdiction. Any enhanced zip code assignment changed in accordance with
section 13 of this act is deemed to be in compliance with this section. For
purposes of this section, there is a rebuttable presumption that a home service
provider has exercised due diligence if the home service provider demonstrates
that it has:

(a) Expended reasonable
resources to implement and maintain an appropriately detailed electronic data
base of street address assignments to taxing jurisdictions;

(b) Implemented and
maintained reasonable internal controls to correct misassignments of street
addresses to taxing jurisdictions promptly; and

(c) Used all reasonably
obtainable and usable data pertaining to municipal annexations, incorporations,
reorganizations, and any other changes in jurisdictional boundaries that
materially affect the accuracy of the data base.

(2) Subsection (1) of
this section applies to a mobile telecommunications service provider that is in
compliance with the requirements of subsection (1) of this section, if in this
state an electronic data base has not been provided under section 11 of this
act, until the later of:

(a) Eighteen months
after the nationwide standard numeric code described in section 11(1) of this
act has been approved by the federation of tax administrators and the
multistate tax commission; or

(b) Six months after
the department or a designated data base provider in this state provides the
data base as prescribed in section 11(1) of this act.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
13. A new section is added
to chapter 82.32 RCW to read as follows:

A taxing jurisdiction,
or the department on behalf of any taxing jurisdiction or taxing jurisdictions
within this state, may:

(1) Determine that the
address used for purposes of determining the taxing jurisdictions to which
taxes, charges, or fees for mobile telecommunications services are remitted
does not meet the definition of place of primary use in RCW 82.04.065 and give
binding notice to the home service provider to change the place of primary use
on a prospective basis from the date of notice of determination. If the
authority making the determination is not the department, the taxing
jurisdiction must obtain the consent of all affected taxing jurisdictions
within the state before giving the notice of determination. Before the taxing
jurisdiction gives the notice of determination, the customer must be given an
opportunity to demonstrate, in accordance with applicable state or local tax,
charge, or fee administrative procedures, that the address is the customer's
place of primary use; and

(2) Determine that the
assignment of a taxing jurisdiction by a home service provider under section 12
of this act does not reflect the correct taxing jurisdiction and give binding
notice to the home service provider to change the assignment on a prospective
basis from the date of notice of determination. If the authority making the
determination is not the department, the taxing jurisdiction must obtain the
consent of all affected taxing jurisdictions within the state before giving the
notice of determination. The home service provider must be given an
opportunity to demonstrate, in accordance with applicable state or local tax,
charge, or fee administrative procedures, that the assignment reflects the
correct taxing jurisdiction.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
14. A new section is added
to chapter 82.32 RCW to read as follows:

(1) A home service
provider is responsible for obtaining and maintaining information regarding the
customer's place of primary use as defined in RCW 82.04.065. Subject to
section 13 of this act, and if the home service provider's reliance on
information provided by its customer is in good faith, a taxing jurisdiction
shall:

(a) Allow a home
service provider to rely on the applicable residential or business street
address supplied by the home service provider's customer; and

(b) Not hold a mobile
telecommunications service provider liable for any additional taxes, charges,
or fees based on a different determination of the place of primary use.

(2) Except as provided
in section 13 of this act, a taxing jurisdiction shall allow a home service
provider to treat the address used by the home service provider for tax
purposes for any customer under a service contract or agreement in effect on
August 1, 2002, as that customer's place of primary use for the remaining term
of the service contract or agreement, excluding any extension or renewal of the
service contract or agreement, for purposes of determining the taxing
jurisdictions to which taxes, charges, or fees on charges for mobile
telecommunications services are remitted.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
15. A new section is added
to chapter 82.32 RCW to read as follows:

(1) This act does not
modify, impair, supersede, or authorize the modification, impairment, or
supersession of any law allowing a taxing jurisdiction to collect a tax,
charge, or fee from a customer that has failed to provide its place of primary
use.

(2) If a taxing
jurisdiction does not otherwise subject charges for mobile telecommunications
services to taxation and if these charges are aggregated with and not
separately stated from charges that are subject to taxation, then the charges
for nontaxable mobile telecommunications services may be subject to taxation
unless the mobile telecommunications service provider can reasonably identify
charges not subject to the tax, charge, or fee from its books and records that
are kept in the regular course of business.

(3) If a taxing
jurisdiction does not subject charges for mobile telecommunications services to
taxation, a customer may not rely upon the nontaxability of charges for mobile
telecommunications services unless the customer's home service provider
separately states the charges for nontaxable mobile telecommunications services
from taxable charges or the home service provider elects, after receiving a
written request from the customer in the form required by the provider, to
provide verifiable data based upon the home service provider's books and
records that are kept in the regular course of business that reasonably
identifies the nontaxable charges.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
16. A new section is added
to chapter 35.21 RCW to read as follows:

If a customer believes
that an amount of city tax or an assignment of place of primary use or taxing
jurisdiction included on a billing for mobile telecommunications services is
erroneous, the customer shall notify the home service provider in writing. The
customer shall include in this written notification the street address for the
customer's place of primary use, the account name and number for which the
customer seeks a correction, and a description of the error asserted by the
customer. Within sixty days of receiving a notice under this section, the home
service provider shall review its records and the electronic data base or
enhanced zip code used pursuant to sections 11 and 12 of this act to determine
the customer's taxing jurisdiction. The home service provider shall notify the
customer in writing of the results of its review.

The procedures in this
section shall be the first remedy available to customers seeking correction of
assignment of place of primary use or taxing jurisdiction, or a refund of or
other compensation for taxes, charges, and fees erroneously collected by the
home service provider, and no cause of action based upon a dispute arising from
such taxes, charges, or fees shall accrue to the extent otherwise permitted by
law until a customer has reasonably exercised the rights and procedures set forth
in this section.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
17. A new section is added
to chapter 82.32 RCW to read as follows:

The definitions in RCW
82.04.065 apply to sections 11 through 16 of this act.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
18. If a court of competent
jurisdiction enters a final judgment on the merits that is based on federal or
state law, is no longer subject to appeal, and substantially limits or impairs
the essential elements of P.L. 106-252 Secs. 116 through 126, or this act, then
this act is null and void in its entirety.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 19. This act takes effect
August 1, 2002.

---
END ---