BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF
WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1. RCW 4.24.550 and 2001 c
283 s 2 and 2001 c 169 s 2 are each reenacted and amended to read as follows:

(1) In addition to the
disclosure under subsection (5) of this section, public agencies are
authorized to release information to the public regarding sex offenders and
kidnapping offenders when the agency determines that disclosure of the
information is relevant and necessary to protect the public and counteract the
danger created by the particular offender. This authorization applies to
information regarding: (a) Any person adjudicated or convicted of a sex
offense as defined in RCW 9A.44.130 or a kidnapping offense as defined by RCW
9A.44.130; (b) any person under the jurisdiction of the indeterminate sentence
review board as the result of a sex offense or kidnapping offense; (c) any
person committed as a sexually violent predator under chapter 71.09 RCW or as a
sexual psychopath under chapter 71.06 RCW; (d) any person found not guilty of a
sex offense or kidnapping offense by reason of insanity under chapter 10.77
RCW; and (e) any person found incompetent to stand trial for a sex offense or
kidnapping offense and subsequently committed under chapter 71.05 or 71.34 RCW.

(2) Except for the
information specifically required under subsection (5) of this section, the
extent of the public disclosure of relevant and necessary information shall be
rationally related to: (a) The level of risk posed by the offender to the
community; (b) the locations where the offender resides, expects to reside, or
is regularly found; and (c) the needs of the affected community members for
information to enhance their individual and collective safety.

(3) Except for the
information specifically required under subsection (5) of this section, local
law enforcement agencies shall consider the following guidelines in determining
the extent of a public disclosure made under this section: (a) For offenders
classified as risk level I, the agency shall share information with other
appropriate law enforcement agencies and may disclose, upon request, relevant,
necessary, and accurate information to any victim or witness to the offense and
to any individual community member who lives near the residence where the
offender resides, expects to reside, or is regularly found; (b) for offenders
classified as risk level II, the agency may also disclose relevant, necessary,
and accurate information to public and private schools, child day care centers,
family day care providers, businesses and organizations that serve primarily
children, women, or vulnerable adults, and neighbors and community groups near
the residence where the offender resides, expects to reside, or is regularly
found; (c) for offenders classified as risk level III, the agency may also
disclose relevant, necessary, and accurate information to the public at large;
and (d) because more localized notification is not feasible and homeless and
transient offenders may present unique risks to the community, the agency may
also disclose relevant, necessary, and accurate information to the public at
large for offenders registered as homeless or transient.

(4) The county sheriff
with whom an offender classified as risk level III is registered shall cause to
be published by legal notice, advertising, or news release a sex offender
community notification that conforms to the guidelines established under RCW
4.24.5501 in at least one legal newspaper with general circulation in the area
of the sex offender's registered address or location. The county sheriff shall
also cause to be published consistent with this subsection a current list of
level III registered sex offenders, twice yearly. Unless the information is
posted on the web site described in subsection (5) of this section, this
list shall be maintained by the county sheriff on a publicly accessible web
site and shall be updated at least once per month.

(5) When funded by
federal grants or other sources other than state funds, the Washington
association of sheriffs and police chiefs shall create and maintain a statewide
registered sex offender web site, which shall be available to the public. The
web site shall post all level III registered sex offenders in the state of
Washington. The web site shall contain, but is not limited to, the registered
sex offender's name, relevant criminal convictions, address by hundred block,
physical description, and photograph. The web site shall provide mapping
capabilities that display the sex offender's address by hundred block on a
map. The web site shall allow citizens to search for registered sex offenders
within the state of Washington by county, city, zip code, last name, type of
conviction, and address by hundred block.

(6) Local law
enforcement agencies that disseminate information pursuant to this section
shall: (a) Review available risk level classifications made by the department
of corrections, the department of social and health services, and the
indeterminate sentence review board; (b) assign risk level classifications to
all offenders about whom information will be disseminated; and (c) make a good
faith effort to notify the public and residents at least fourteen days before
the offender is released from confinement or, where an offender moves from
another jurisdiction, as soon as possible after the agency learns of the
offender's move, except that in no case may this notification provision be
construed to require an extension of an offender's release date. The juvenile
court shall provide local law enforcement officials with all relevant
information on offenders allowed to remain in the community in a timely manner.

(((6))) (7)
An appointed or elected public official, public employee, or public agency as
defined in RCW 4.24.470 ((is)), or units of local government and its
employees, as provided in RCW 36.28A.010, are immune from civil liability
for damages for any discretionary risk level classification decisions or
release of relevant and necessary information, unless it is shown that the
official, employee, or agency acted with gross negligence or in bad faith. The
immunity in this section applies to risk level classification decisions and the
release of relevant and necessary information regarding any individual for whom
disclosure is authorized. The decision of a local law enforcement agency or
official to classify an offender to a risk level other than the one assigned by
the department of corrections, the department of social and health services, or
the indeterminate sentence review board, or the release of any relevant and
necessary information based on that different classification shall not, by
itself, be considered gross negligence or bad faith. The immunity provided
under this section applies to the release of relevant and necessary information
to other public officials, public employees, or public agencies, and to the
general public.

(((7))) (8)
Except as may otherwise be provided by law, nothing in this section shall
impose any liability upon a public official, public employee, or public agency
for failing to release information authorized under this section.

(((8))) (9)
Nothing in this section implies that information regarding persons designated
in subsection (1) of this section is confidential except as may otherwise be
provided by law.

(((9))) (10)
When a local law enforcement agency or official classifies an offender
differently than the offender is classified by the ((department of
corrections,)) end of sentence review committee or the department of
social and health services((, or the indeterminate sentence review board))
at the time of the offender's release from confinement, the law
enforcement agency or official shall notify the ((appropriate department or
the board)) end of sentence review committee and submit its reasons
supporting the change in classification. Notification of the change shall
also be sent to the Washington association of sheriffs and police chiefs.

Sec. 2. RCW 43.43.540 and 1998 c
220 s 4 are each amended to read as follows:

The county
sheriff shall (1) forward the information, photographs, and fingerprints
obtained pursuant to RCW 9A.44.130, including any notice of change of address,
to the Washington state patrol within five working days; and (2) forward any
information obtained pursuant to RCW 9A.44.130 that is necessary to operate the
registered sex offender web site described in RCW 4.24.550 to the Washington
association of sheriffs and police chiefs within five working days of receiving
the information, including any notice of change of address or change in risk
level notification. The state patrol shall maintain a central registry of
sex offenders and kidnapping offenders required to register under RCW 9A.44.130
and shall adopt rules consistent with chapters 10.97, 10.98, and 43.43 RCW as
are necessary to carry out the purposes of RCW 9A.44.130, 9A.44.140, 10.01.200,
43.43.540, 46.20.187, 70.48.470, and 72.09.330. The Washington state patrol
shall reimburse the counties for the costs of processing the offender
registration, including taking the fingerprints and the photographs.

---
END ---