BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF
WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1. RCW 18.106.110 and 1997
c 307 s 1 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) There is created a
state advisory board of plumbers, to be composed of five members appointed by
the governor. Two members shall be journeyman plumbers, two members shall be
persons conducting a plumbing business, and one member from the general public
who is familiar with the business and trade of plumbing.

(2) The term of one
journeyman plumber expires July 1, 1995; the term of the second journeyman
plumber expires July 1, 2000; the term of one person conducting a plumbing
business expires July 1, 1996; the term of the second person conducting a
plumbing business expires July 1, 2000; and the term of the public member
expires July 1, 1997. Thereafter, upon the expiration of said terms, the
governor shall appoint a new member to serve for a period of three years.
However, to ensure that the board can continue to act, a member whose term
expires shall continue to serve until his or her replacement is appointed. In
the case of any vacancy on the board for any reason, the governor shall appoint
a new member to serve out the term of the person whose position has become
vacant.

(3) The advisory board
shall carry out all the functions and duties enumerated in this chapter, as
well as generally advise the department on all matters relative to this chapter
including proposed legislation.

(4) Each
member of the advisory board shall receive travel expenses in accordance with
the provisions of RCW 43.03.050 and 43.03.060 as now existing or hereafter
amended for each day in which such member is actually engaged in attendance
upon the meetings of the advisory board.

--- END ---