BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF
WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec.
1. The legislature
recognizes that western states bordering on the Pacific Ocean have approved
separate laws on ballast water that affect commercial shipping for the
protection of waterways from aquatic nuisance species. Legislatures in these
states have recognized the international threat to waterways and the difficulty
that any one state has in legally and cost-effectively managing this issue.

The states of
Washington and Oregon have a unique stewardship and challenge in jointly
managing issues affecting the navigable waters of the Columbia river system.
This joint stewardship must deal efficiently and effectively with ballast water
management in order to have an effective aquatic nuisance species prevention
program, but not unduly impair the regional and international trade that is so
important to our economies. When practical and cost-effective, implementation
of ballast water management laws, rules, and regulations adopted by the states
of Washington and Oregon should be coordinated among all affected parties,
including all public agencies and private interests.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
2. (1) For ballast water
management in the navigable waters of the Columbia river system, the director
of the department of fish and wildlife must monitor the activities of the task
force created by the state of Oregon in 2001 Or. Laws 722, concerning ballast
water management. Before ballast water treatment technologies go into effect
for the navigable waters of the Columbia river system, the director, in
consultation with the task force, must:

(a) Determine practical
and cost-effective ballast water treatment technologies suitable for the
navigable waters of the Columbia river system;

(b) Determine
appropriate standards for discharge of treated ballast water in the navigable
waters of the Columbia river system;

(c) Determine the
degree to which exchange of ballast water decreases the risk of transporting
aquatic nuisance species into the navigable waters of the Columbia river
system;

(d) Determine the
compatibility of treatment with laws enacted by the United States congress and
regulations promulgated by the United States coast guard and ballast water
regulations by other western states and British Columbia;

(e) Research
requirements for ballast water treatment technology and other areas of concern
related to the possible introduction of aquatic nuisance species; and

(f) Recommend
amendments to the National Invasive Species Act of 1996, P.L. 104-332, for a
single national system of regulation.

(2) The director of the
department of fish and wildlife must submit a report to the natural resources
committees of the legislature by January 2003. The report must contain the
findings and recommendations required in subsection (1) of this section,
including a recommendation for a date to require treatment of ballast water.

Sec. 3. RCW 77.120.030 and 2000
c 108 s 4 are each amended to read as follows:

The owner or operator
in charge of any vessel covered by this chapter is required to ensure that the
vessel under their ownership or control does not discharge ballast water into
the waters of the state except as authorized by this section.

(1) Discharge into
waters of the state is authorized if the vessel has conducted an open sea
exchange of ballast water. A vessel is exempt from this requirement if the
vessel's master reasonably determines that such a ballast water exchange
operation will threaten the safety of the vessel or the vessel's crew, or is
not feasible due to vessel design limitations or equipment failure. If a
vessel relies on this exemption, then it may discharge ballast water into
waters of the state, subject to any requirements of treatment under subsection
(2) of this section and subject to RCW 77.120.040.

(2) After July 1, 2002,
except for the navigable waters of the Columbia river system, discharge
of ballast water into waters of the state is authorized only if there has been
an open sea exchange or if the vessel has treated its ballast water to meet
standards set by the department. When weather or extraordinary circumstances
make access to treatment unsafe to the vessel or crew, the master of a vessel
may delay compliance with any treatment required under this subsection until it
is safe to complete the treatment.

(3) The requirements of
this section do not apply to a vessel discharging ballast water or sediments
that originated solely within the waters of Washington state, the navigable
waters of the Columbia river system, or the internal waters of British
Columbia south of latitude fifty degrees north, including the waters of the
Straits of Georgia and Juan de Fuca.

(4) Open sea exchange
is an exchange that occurs fifty or more nautical miles offshore. If the
United States coast guard requires a vessel to conduct an exchange further
offshore, then that distance is the required distance for purposes of
compliance with this chapter.

Sec. 4. RCW 77.120.040 and 2000
c 108 s 5 are each amended to read as follows:

The owner or operator
in charge of any vessel covered by this chapter, except vessels traversing
the navigable waters of the Columbia river system, is required to ensure
that the vessel under their ownership or control complies with the reporting
and sampling requirements of this section.

(1) Vessels covered by
this chapter must report ballast water management information to the department
using ballast water management forms that are acceptable to the United States
coast guard. The frequency, manner, and form of such reporting shall be
established by the department by rule. Any vessel may rely on a recognized
marine trade association to collect and forward this information to the
department.

(2) In order to monitor
the effectiveness of national and international efforts to prevent the
introduction of nonindigenous species, all vessels covered by this chapter must
submit nonindigenous species ballast water monitoring data. The monitoring, sampling,
testing protocols, and methods of identifying nonindigenous species in ballast
water shall be determined by the department by rule. A vessel covered by this
chapter may contract with a recognized marine trade association to randomly
sample vessels within that association's membership, and provide data to the
department.

(3) Vessels that do not
belong to a recognized marine trade association must submit individual ballast
tank sample data to the department for each voyage.

(4) All data submitted
to the department under subsection (2) of this section shall be consistent with
sampling and testing protocols as adopted by the department by rule.

(5) The department
shall adopt rules to implement this section. The rules and recommendations
shall be developed in consultation with advisors from regulated industries and
the potentially affected parties, including but not limited to shipping
interests, ports, shellfish growers, fisheries, environmental interests,
interested citizens who have knowledge of the issues, and appropriate
governmental representatives including the United States coast guard.

(a) The department
shall set standards for the discharge of treated ballast water into the waters
of the state. The rules are intended to ensure that the discharge of treated
ballast water poses minimal risk of introducing nonindigenous species. In
developing this standard, the department shall consider the extent to which the
requirement is technologically and practically feasible. Where practical and
appropriate, the standards shall be compatible with standards set by the United
States coast guard and shall be developed in consultation with federal and
state agencies to ensure consistency with the federal clean water act, 33
U.S.C. Sec. 1251-1387.

(b) The department
shall adopt ballast water sampling and testing protocols for monitoring the
biological components of ballast water that may be discharged into the waters
of the state under this chapter. Monitoring data is intended to assist the
department in evaluating the risk of new, nonindigenous species introductions
from the discharge of ballast water, and to evaluate the accuracy of ballast
water exchange practices. The sampling and testing protocols must consist of
cost-effective, scientifically verifiable methods that, to the extent practical
and without compromising the purposes of this chapter, utilize easily measured
indices, such as salinity, or check for species that indicate the potential
presence of nonindigenous species or pathogenic species. The department shall
specify appropriate quality assurance and quality control for the sampling and
testing protocols.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
5. A new section is added
to chapter 77.120 RCW to read as follows:

(1) The director of the
department of fish and wildlife must adopt rules for ballast water management
in the navigable water of the Columbia river system. The rules must include,
but are not limited to, provisions pertaining to reporting requirements and
ballast water discharge. No rules regarding ballast water treatment
technologies for use in the Columbia river system may be adopted until after
the conclusion of the 2003 regular legislative session.

(2) The monitoring,
sampling, testing protocols, and methods of identifying nonindigenous species
in ballast water for the navigable waters of the Columbia river system must be
adopted by the department by rule. In developing the rule, the department must
take into account the research and activities of the task force created under
section 2 of this act in order to coordinate the collection of sampling and
testing data. The department may use third parties, research organizations, or
colleges and universities to collect sampling and testing data, including
appropriate scientific methods and protocols, frequency of sampling, and other
appropriate procedures.

(3) Rules adopted under
this section must consider rules adopted by the state of Oregon for ballast
water management in the navigable waters of the Columbia river system.

Sec. 6. RCW 77.120.060 and 2000
c 108 s 7 are each amended to read as follows:

The legislature
recognizes that international and national laws relating to this chapter are
changing and that state law must adapt accordingly. The department shall
submit to the legislature, and make available to the public, a report that
summarizes the results of this chapter and makes recommendations for
improvement to this chapter on or before December 1, 2001, and a second report
on or before December 1, 2004. The 2001 report shall describe how the costs of
treatment required as of July 1, 2002, will be substantially equivalent among
ports where treatment is required. The 2004 report must describe how the
states of Washington and Oregon are coordinating their efforts for ballast
water management on the Columbia river. The department shall strive to
fund the provisions of this chapter through existing resources, cooperative
agreements with the maritime industry, and federal funding sources.

Sec. 7. RCW 77.120.070 and 2000
c 108 s 8 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) Except as limited
by subsection (2) or (3) of this section, the director or the director's
designee may impose a civil penalty or warning for a violation of the
requirements of this chapter on the owner or operator in charge of a vessel who
fails to comply with the requirements imposed under RCW 77.120.030 ((and)),
77.120.040, and section 5 of this act. The penalty shall not exceed
five thousand dollars for each violation. In determining the amount of a civil
penalty, the department shall consider if the violation was intentional,
negligent, or without any fault, and shall consider the quality and nature of
risks created by the violation. The owner or operator subject to such a
penalty may contest the determination by requesting an adjudicative proceeding
within twenty days. Any determination not timely contested is final and may be
reduced to a judgment enforceable in any court with jurisdiction. If the
department prevails using any judicial process to collect a penalty under this
section, the department shall also be awarded its costs and reasonable
attorneys' fees.

(2) The civil penalty
for a violation of reporting requirements of RCW 77.120.040 or section 5 of
this act shall not exceed five hundred dollars per violation.

(3) Any owner or
operator who knowingly, and with intent to deceive, falsifies a ballast water
management report form is liable for a civil penalty in an amount not to exceed
five thousand dollars per violation, in addition to any criminal liability that
may attach to the filing of false documents.

(4) The
department, in cooperation with the United States coast guard, may enforce the
requirements of this chapter.

---
END ---