BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF
WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1. RCW 28A.410.200 and 2000
c 39 s 102 are each amended to read as follows:

(1)(a) The
Washington professional educator standards board is created, consisting of
nineteen members to be appointed by the governor to four-year terms and the
superintendent of public instruction, who shall be an ex officio, nonvoting
member.

(b) As the four-year
terms of the first appointees expire or vacancies to the board occur for the
first time, the governor shall appoint or reappoint the members of the board to
one-year to four-year staggered terms. Once the one-year to three-year terms
expire, all subsequent terms shall be for four years, with the terms expiring
on June 30th of the applicable year. The terms shall be staggered in such a
way that, where possible, the terms of members representing a specific group do
not expire simultaneously.

(c) No person
may serve as a member of the board for more than two consecutive full four-year
terms.

(d) The governor
shall annually appoint the chair of the board from among the teachers and
principals on the board. No board member may serve as chair for more than two
consecutive years.

(2) Seven of the
members shall be public school teachers, one shall be a private school teacher,
three shall represent higher education educator preparation programs, four
shall be school administrators, two shall be educational staff associates, one
shall be a parent, and one shall be a member of the public.

(3) Public school
teachers appointed to the board must:

(a) Have at least three
years of teaching experience in a Washington public school;

(b) Be currently
certificated and actively employed in a teaching position; and

(c) Include one teacher
currently teaching at the elementary school level, one at the middle school
level, one at the high school level, and one vocationally certificated.

(4) Private school
teachers appointed to the board must:

(a) Have at least three
years of teaching experience in a Washington approved private school; and

(b) Be currently
certificated and actively employed in a teaching position in an approved
private school.

(5) Appointees from
higher education educator preparation programs must include two representatives
from institutions of higher education as defined in RCW 28B.10.016 and one
representative from an institution of higher education as defined in RCW
28B.07.020(4).

(6) School
administrators appointed to the board must:

(a) Have at least three
years of administrative experience in a Washington public school district;

(b) Be currently
certificated and actively employed in a school administrator position; and

(c) Include two public
school principals, one Washington approved private school principal, and one
superintendent.

(7) Educational staff
associates appointed to the board must:

(a) Have at least three
years of educational staff associate experience in a Washington public school
district; and

(b) Be currently
certificated and actively employed in an educational staff associate position.

(8) Each major caucus
of the house of representatives and the senate shall submit a list of at least
one public school teacher. In making the public school teacher appointments,
the governor shall select one nominee from each list provided by each caucus.
The governor shall appoint the remaining members of the board from a list of
qualified nominees submitted to the governor by organizations representative of
the constituencies of the board, from applications from other qualified
individuals, or from both nominees and applicants.

(9) All appointments to
the board made by the governor shall be subject to confirmation by the senate.

(10) The governor shall
appoint the members of the initial board no later than June 1, 2000.

(11) In appointing
board members, the governor shall consider the diversity of the population of
the state.

(12) Each member of the
board shall be compensated in accordance with RCW 43.03.240 and shall be
reimbursed for travel expenses incurred in carrying out the duties of the board
in accordance with RCW 43.03.050 and 43.03.060.

(13) The governor may
remove a member of the board for neglect of duty, misconduct, malfeasance or
misfeasance in office, or for incompetency or unprofessional conduct as defined
in chapter 18.130 RCW. In such a case, the governor shall file with the secretary
of state a statement of the causes for and the order of removal from office,
and the secretary of state shall send a certified copy of the statement of
causes and order of removal to the last known post office address of the
member.

(14) If a vacancy
occurs on the board, the governor shall appoint a replacement member from the
nominees as specified in subsection (8) of this section to fill the remainder
of the unexpired term. When filling a vacancy of a member nominated by a major
caucus of the legislature, the governor shall select the new member from a list
of at least one name submitted by the same caucus that provided the list from
which the retiring member was appointed.

(15) Members of the
board shall hire an executive director and an administrative assistant to
reside in the office of the superintendent of public instruction for
administrative purposes only.

Sec. 2. RCW 28A.410.220 and 2000
c 39 s 201 are each amended to read as follows:

(1)(a) Beginning not
later than September 1, 2001, the Washington professional educator standards
board shall make available and pilot a means of assessing an applicant's
knowledge in the basic skills. For the purposes of this section, "basic
skills" means the subjects of at least reading, writing, and mathematics.
Beginning September 1, 2002, except as provided in (c) of this subsection and
subsection (3) of this section, passing this assessment shall be required for
admission to approved teacher preparation programs and for persons from
out-of-state applying for a Washington state residency teaching certificate.

(b) On an individual
student basis, approved teacher preparation programs may admit into their
programs a candidate who has not achieved the minimum basic skills assessment
score established by the Washington professional educator standards board.
Individuals so admitted may not receive residency certification without passing
the basic skills assessment under this section.

(c) The Washington
professional educator standards board may establish criteria to ensure that
persons from out-of-state who are applying for residency certification and
persons applying to master's degree level teacher preparation programs can
demonstrate to the board's satisfaction that they have the requisite basic
skills based upon having completed another basic skills assessment acceptable
to the Washington professional educator standards board or by some other
alternative approved by the Washington professional educator standards board.

(2) Beginning not later
than September 1, 2002, the Washington professional educator standards board
shall provide for the initial piloting and implementation of a means of
assessing an applicant's knowledge in the subjects for which the applicant has
applied for an endorsement to his or her residency or professional teaching
certificate. The assessment of subject knowledge shall not include
instructional methodology. Beginning September 1, ((2003)) 2005,
passing this assessment shall be required to receive an endorsement for
certification purposes.

(3) The Washington
professional educator standards board may permit exceptions from the assessment
requirements under subsections (1) and (2) of this section on a case-by-case
basis.

(4) The Washington
professional educator standards board shall provide for reasonable
accommodations for individuals who are required to take the assessments in
subsection (1) or (2) of this section if the individuals have learning or other
disabilities.

(5) With the exception
of applicants exempt from the requirements of subsections (1) and (2) of this
section, an applicant must achieve a minimum assessment score or scores
established by the Washington professional educator standards board on each of
the assessments under subsections (1) and (2) of this section.

(6) The Washington
professional educator standards board and superintendent of public instruction,
as determined by the Washington professional educator standards board, may
contract with one or more third parties for:

(a) The development,
purchase, administration, scoring, and reporting of scores of the assessments
established by the Washington professional educator standards board under
subsections (1) and (2) of this section;

(b) Related clerical
and administrative activities; or

(c) Any combination of
the purposes in this subsection.

(7) Applicants for
admission to a Washington teacher preparation program and applicants for
residency and professional certificates who are required to successfully
complete one or more of the assessments under subsections (1) and (2) of this
section, and who are charged a fee for the assessment by a third party
contracted with under subsection (6) of this section, shall pay the fee charged
by the contractor directly to the contractor. Such fees shall be reasonably
related to the actual costs of the contractor in providing the assessment.

(8) The superintendent
of public instruction is responsible for supervision and providing support
services to administer this section.

(9) The Washington professional
educator standards board shall collaboratively select or develop and implement
the assessments and minimum assessment scores required under this section with
the superintendent of public instruction and shall provide opportunities for
representatives of other interested educational organizations to participate in
the selection or development and implementation of such assessments in a manner
deemed appropriate by the Washington professional educator standards board.

(10) The
Washington professional educator standards board shall adopt rules under
chapter 34.05 RCW that are reasonably necessary for the effective and efficient
implementation of this section.

---
END ---