BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF
WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec.
1. It is the intent of the
legislature to prevent terrorist attacks, and thereby save the lives of
Washington residents by providing appropriate investigative tools that
facilitate and promote cooperation between local, state, and federal law
enforcement agencies, that remove barriers to cooperation in terrorism
investigations, and that continue to protect the privacy rights of residents of
the state.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
2. A new section is added
to chapter 9.73 RCW to read as follows:

The attorney general or
any deputy or assistant attorney general specifically designated by the
attorney general, or a prosecuting attorney or any deputy or assistant
prosecuting attorney specifically designated by a prosecuting attorney, may
authorize an application to a superior court for, and the court may grant, in
conformity with section 3 of this act, an order authorizing the interception,
by a law enforcement agency having responsibility for the investigation of the
offense as to which the application is made, of wire, oral, or electronic
communications if the interception may provide evidence of an act of terrorism.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
3. A new section is added
to chapter 9.73 RCW to read as follows:

(1) Each application
pursuant to section 2 of this act for an order authorizing the interception of
a wire, oral, or electronic communication shall be made in writing upon oath or
affirmation to a superior court and shall state the applicant's authority to
make the application. Each application shall include the following
information:

(a) The identity of the
investigative or law enforcement officer making the application, and the
officer authorizing the application;

(b) A full and complete
statement of the facts and circumstances relied upon by the applicant, to
justify his or her belief that an order should be issued, including (i) details
as to the particular act of terrorism that has been, is being, or is about to
be committed, (ii) except as provided in subsection (11) of this section, a
particular description of the nature and location of the facilities from which
or the place where the communication is to be intercepted, (iii) a particular
description of the type of communications sought to be intercepted, and (iv)
the identity of the person, if known, committing the offense and whose
communications are to be intercepted;

(c) A full and complete
statement as to whether or not other investigative procedures have been tried
and failed or why they reasonably appear to be unlikely to succeed if tried or
to be too dangerous;

(d) A statement of the
period of time for which the interception is required to be maintained. If the
nature of the investigation is such that the authorization of interceptions
should not automatically terminate when the described type of communication has
been first obtained, a particular description of facts establishing probable
cause to believe that additional communications of the same type will occur
thereafter;

(e) A full and complete
statement of the facts concerning all previous applications known to the
individual authorizing and making the application, made to any court for
authorization to intercept wire, oral, or electronic communications involving
any of the same persons, facilities, or places specified in the application,
and the action taken by the court on each such application; and

(f) Where the
application is for the extension of an order, a statement setting forth the
results thus far obtained from the interception, or a reasonable explanation of
the failure to obtain results.

(2) The court may
require the applicant to furnish additional testimony or documentary evidence
in support of the application.

(3) Upon receiving the
application, the court may enter an ex parte order, as requested or as
modified, authorizing interception of wire, oral, or electronic communications,
if the court determines on the basis of the facts submitted by the applicant
that:

(a) There is probable
cause for belief that a person is committing, has committed, or is about to
commit an act of terrorism;

(b) There is probable
cause for belief that particular communications concerning the offense will be
obtained through the interception;

(c) Normal
investigative procedures have been tried and have failed or reasonably appear
to be unlikely to succeed if tried or to be too dangerous;

(d) Except as provided
in subsection (11) of this section, there is probable cause for belief that the
facilities from which, or the place where, the wire, oral, or electronic
communications are to be intercepted are being used, or are about to be used,
in connection with the commission of the offense, or are leased to, listed in
the name of, or commonly used by such person.

(4) Each order
authorizing the interception of any wire, oral, or electronic communication
under this section shall specify:

(a) The identity of the
person, if known, whose communications are to be intercepted;

(b) The nature and
location of the communications facilities as to which, or the place where,
authority to intercept is to be granted;

(c) A particular
description of the type of communication sought to be intercepted, and a
statement of the particular offense to which it relates;

(d) The identity of the
agency authorized to intercept the communications, and of the person
authorizing the application; and

(e) The period of time
during which the interception is authorized, including a statement as to
whether or not the interception shall automatically terminate when the
described communication has been first obtained.

(5) An order
authorizing the interception of a wire, oral, or electronic communication under
this section shall, upon request of the applicant, direct that a provider of
wire or electronic communication service, landlord, custodian, or other person
shall furnish the applicant forthwith all information, facilities, and
technical assistance necessary to accomplish the interception unobtrusively and
with a minimum of interference with the services that the service provider,
landlord, custodian, or such other person is according the person whose
communications are to be intercepted. Any service provider, landlord,
custodian, or other person furnishing such facilities or technical assistance
shall be compensated by the applicant for reasonable expenses incurred in
providing the facilities or assistance.

(6) No order entered
under this section may authorize the interception of any wire, oral, or
electronic communication for any period longer than is necessary to achieve the
objective of the authorization, nor in any event longer than thirty days. The
thirty‑day period begins on the earlier of the day on which the
investigative or law enforcement officer first begins to conduct an
interception under the order or ten days after the order is entered.
Extensions of an order may be granted, but only upon application for an
extension made in accordance with subsection (1) of this section and the court
making the findings required by subsection (3) of this section. The period of
extension shall be no longer than the authorizing court deems necessary to
achieve the purposes for which it is granted and in no event for longer than
thirty days. Every order and extension shall contain a provision that the
authorization to intercept shall be executed as soon as practicable, shall be
conducted in such a way as to minimize the interception of communications not
otherwise subject to interception under this section, and must terminate upon attainment
of the authorized objective, or in any event in thirty days. In the event the
intercepted communication is in a code or foreign language, and an expert in
that code or foreign language is not reasonably available during the
interception period, minimization may be accomplished as soon as practicable
after the interception. An interception under this section may be conducted in
whole or in part by employees of the state or a political subdivision of the
state, or by an individual operating under a contract with the state or a
political subdivision of the state, when acting under the supervision of an
investigative or law enforcement officer authorized to conduct the
interception.

(7) Whenever an order
authorizing interception is entered pursuant to this section, the order may
require reports to be made to the court that issued the order showing what
progress has been made toward achievement of the authorized objective and the
need for continued interception. The reports shall be made at such intervals
as the court may require.

(8)(a) The contents of
any wire, oral, or electronic communication intercepted by any means authorized
by this section shall, if possible, be recorded on tape or wire or other
comparable device. The recording of the contents of any wire, oral, or
electronic communication under this subsection shall be done in such a way as
will protect the recording from editing or other alterations. Immediately upon
the expiration of the period of the order, or extensions thereof, the recordings
shall be made available to the court issuing the order and shall be sealed
under the court's directions. Custody of the recordings shall be wherever the
court orders. The recordings shall not be destroyed except upon an order of
the issuing court and in any event shall be kept for at least ten years.
Duplicate recordings may be made for use, or for disclosure pursuant to the
provisions of section 6 (1) and (2) of this act, for investigations. The
presence of the seal provided for by this subsection, or a satisfactory
explanation for the absence thereof, shall be a prerequisite for the use or
disclosure of the contents of any wire, oral, or electronic communication or
derivative evidence under section 6(3) of this act.

(b) Applications made
and orders granted under this section shall be sealed by the court. Custody of
the applications and orders shall be wherever the court directs. The
applications and orders shall be disclosed only upon a showing of good cause
before a superior court and shall not be destroyed except on order of the
issuing or denying court, and in any event shall be kept for at least ten
years.

(c) Any violation of
the provisions of this subsection may be punished as contempt of the issuing or
denying court.

(d) Within a reasonable
time but not later than ninety days after the termination of the period of an
order or extensions thereof, the issuing court shall cause to be served, on the
persons named in the order, and such other parties to intercepted
communications as the court may determine is in the interest of justice, an
inventory which shall include notice of (i) the fact of the entry of the order,
(ii) the date of the entry and the period of authorized interception, and (iii)
whether during that period wire, oral, or electronic communications were or
were not intercepted.

The court, upon the
filing of a motion, may make available to any such person or party or his or
her counsel for inspection such portions of the intercepted communications and
orders as the court determines to be in the interest of justice. On an ex
parte showing of good cause to the court, the serving of the inventory required
by this subsection may be postponed.

(9) The contents of any
wire, oral, or electronic communication intercepted pursuant to this section or
evidence derived from such contents shall not be received in evidence or
otherwise disclosed in any trial, hearing, or other proceeding in a court of
this state unless each party, not less than ten days before the trial, hearing,
or proceeding, has been furnished with a copy of the court order, and
accompanying application, under which the interception was authorized. This
ten-day period may be waived by the court upon a finding that it was not
possible to furnish the party with the order and application ten days before
the trial, hearing, or proceeding and that the party will not be prejudiced by
the delay in receiving such information.

(10)(a) An aggrieved
person in any trial, hearing, or other proceeding in or before any court,
administrative law judge, hearing officer or examiner, department, officer,
agency, board, regulatory body, legislative committee, or other similar
authority of this state or any political subdivision of this state may move to
suppress the contents of any wire, oral, or electronic communication
intercepted pursuant to this section, or evidence derived from such contents,
on the grounds that (i) the communication was unlawfully intercepted; (ii) the
order of authorization under which it was intercepted is insufficient on its
face; or (iii) the interception was not made in conformity with the order of
authorization.

Such a motion shall be
made before the trial, hearing, or proceeding unless there was no opportunity
to make the motion or the person was not aware of the grounds of the motion.
If the motion is granted, the contents of the intercepted wire, oral, or
electronic communication, or evidence derived from such contents, shall be
treated as having been obtained in violation of this section. The court or
person presiding, upon the filing of such a motion by the aggrieved person, may
make available to the aggrieved person or his or her counsel for inspection
such portions of the intercepted communication or derivative evidence as the
court or person presiding determines to be in the interest of justice.

(b) In addition to any
other right to appeal, the state or other proponent of evidence that is
suppressed has the right to appeal from an order granting a motion to suppress
made under (a) of this subsection, if the attorney for the state or other
proponent certifies to the court or other official granting the motion that the
appeal is not taken for purposes of delay. Such an appeal shall be taken
within thirty days after the date the order was entered and shall be diligently
prosecuted.

(11) The requirements
of (1)(b)(ii) and (3)(d) of this section relating to the specification of the
facilities from which, or the place where, a communication is to be intercepted
do not apply if:

(a) In the case of an
application with respect to the interception of an oral communication:

(i) The application is
by an investigative or law enforcement officer and is approved by the attorney
general, a prosecuting attorney, or other attorney authorized to provide such
approval under section 2 of this act;

(ii) The application
contains a full and complete statement as to why such specification is not
practical and identifies the person believed to be committing the offense and
whose communications are to be intercepted; and

(iii) The court finds
that such specification is not practical; and

(b) In the case of an
application with respect to a wire or electronic communication:

(i) The application is
by an investigative or law enforcement officer and is approved by the attorney
general, a prosecuting attorney, or other attorney authorized to provide such
approval under section 2 of this act;

(ii) The application
identifies the person believed to be committing the offense and whose
communications are to be intercepted and the applicant makes a showing that
there is probable cause to believe that the person's actions could have the
effect of thwarting interception from a specified facility;

(iii) The court finds
that such showing has been adequately made; and

(iv) The order
authorizing the interception is limited to interception only for such time as
it is reasonable to presume that the person identified in the application is
reasonably proximate to the instrument through which such communication will be
transmitted.

(12) An interception of
a communication under an order with respect to which the requirements of
(1)(b)(ii) and (3)(d) of this section do not apply by reason of subsection
(11)(a) of this section shall not begin until the facilities from which, or the
place where, the communication is to be intercepted is ascertained by the
person implementing the interception order. A provider of wire or electronic
communication service that has received an order as provided for in subsection
(11)(b) of this section may move the court to modify or quash the order on the
ground that its assistance with respect to the interception cannot be performed
in a timely or reasonable fashion. The court, upon notice to the government,
shall decide such a motion expeditiously.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
4. A new section is added
to chapter 9.73 RCW to read as follows:

(1) As part of a bona
fide criminal investigation, the chief law enforcement officer of a law
enforcement agency or his or her designee above the rank of first line
supervisor may authorize the interception, transmission, or recording of a
conversation or communication by officers under the following circumstances:

(a) At least one party
to the conversation or communication has consented to the interception,
transmission, or recording;

(b) Probable cause
exists to believe that the conversation or communication involves an act of
terrorism; and

(c) A written report
has been completed as required by subsection (2) of this section.

(2) The agency's chief
officer or designee authorizing an interception, transmission, or recording
under subsection (1) of this section shall prepare and sign a written report at
the time of authorization indicating:

(a) The circumstances
that meet the requirements of subsection (1) of this section;

(b) The names of the
authorizing and consenting parties, except that in those cases where the
consenting party is a confidential informant, the name of the confidential
informant need not be divulged;

(c) The names of the
officers authorized to intercept, transmit, and record the conversation or
communication;

(d) The identity of the
particular person or persons, if known, who may have committed or may commit
the offense;

(e) The details of the
particular offense or offenses that may have been or may be committed and the
expected date, location, and approximate time of the conversation or
communication; and

(f) Whether there was
an attempt to obtain authorization pursuant to RCW 9.73.090(2) and, if there
was such an attempt, the outcome of the attempt.

(3) An authorization
under this section is valid in all jurisdictions within Washington state and
for the interception of communications from additional persons if the persons
are brought into the conversation or transaction by the nonconsenting party or
if the nonconsenting party or such additional persons cause or invite the
consenting party to enter another jurisdiction.

(4) The recording of
any conversation or communication under this section shall be done in such a
manner that protects the recording from editing or other alterations.

(5) An authorization
made under this section is valid for no more than twenty-four hours from the
time it is signed by the authorizing officer, and each authorization shall
independently meet all of the requirements of this section. The authorizing
officer shall sign the written report required under subsection (2) of this
section, certifying the exact date and time of his or her signature. An
authorization under this section may be extended not more than twice for an
additional consecutive twenty-four hour period based upon the same probable
cause regarding the same suspected transaction. Each such extension shall be
signed by the authorizing officer.

(6) Within fifteen days
after the signing of an authorization that results in any interception,
transmission, or recording of a conversation or communication pursuant to this
section, the law enforcement agency which made the interception, transmission,
or recording shall submit a report including the original authorization under
subsection (2) of this section to a judge of a court having jurisdiction which
report shall identify (a) the persons, including the consenting party, who
participated in the conversation, and (b) the date, location, and approximate
time of the conversation.

In those cases where
the consenting party is a confidential informant, the name of the confidential
informant need not be divulged.

A monthly report shall
be filed by the law enforcement agency with the administrator for the courts
indicating the number of authorizations granted, the date and time of each
authorization, interceptions made, arrests resulting from an interception, and
subsequent invalidations.

(7)(a) Within two
judicial days of receipt of a report under subsection (6) of this section, the
court shall make an ex parte review of the authorization, but not of the
evidence, and shall make a determination whether the requirements of subsection
(1) of this section were met. If the court determines that any of the
requirements of subsection (1) of this section were not met, the court shall
order that any recording and any copies or transcriptions of the conversation
or communication be destroyed. Destruction of recordings, copies, or
transcriptions shall be stayed pending any appeal of a finding that the
requirements of subsection (1) of this section were not met.

(b) Absent a
continuation under (c) of this subsection, six months following a determination
under (a) of this subsection that probable cause did not exist, the court shall
cause a notice to be mailed to the last known address of any nonconsenting
party to the conversation or communication that was the subject of the
authorization. The notice shall indicate the date, time, and place of any
interception, transmission, or recording made pursuant to the authorization.
The notice shall also identify the agency that sought the authorization and
shall indicate that a review under (a) of this subsection resulted in a
determination that the authorization was made in violation of this section.

(c) An authorizing
agency may obtain six-month extensions to the notice requirement of (b) of this
subsection in cases of active, ongoing criminal investigations that might be
jeopardized by sending the notice.

(8) In any subsequent
judicial proceeding, evidence obtained through the interception or recording of
a conversation or communication pursuant to this section shall be admissible
only if:

(a) The court finds
that the requirements of subsection (1) of this section were met and the
evidence is used in prosecuting an offense identified in subsection (1)(b) of
this section, or the evidence is used in accordance with section 6 of this act;
or

(b) The evidence is
admitted with the permission of the person whose communication or conversation
was intercepted, transmitted, or recorded; or

(c) The evidence is
admitted in a prosecution for a serious violent offense as defined in RCW
9.94A.030 in which a party who consented to the interception, transmission, or
recording was a victim of the offense; or

(d) The evidence is
admitted in a civil suit for personal injury or wrongful death arising out of
the same incident, in which a party who consented to the interception,
transmission, or recording was a victim of a serious violent offense as defined
in RCW 9.94A.030.

Nothing in this
subsection bars the admission of testimony of a party or eyewitness to the
intercepted, transmitted, or recorded conversation or communication when that
testimony is unaided by information obtained solely by violation of RCW
9.73.030.

(9) Any determination
of invalidity of an authorization under this section shall be reported by the
court to the office of the administrator for the courts.

(10) Any person who
intentionally intercepts, transmits, or records or who intentionally authorizes
the interception, transmission, or recording of a conversation or communication
in violation of this section is guilty of a class C felony punishable according
to chapter 9A.20 RCW.

(11) An authorizing
agency is liable for twenty-five thousand dollars in exemplary damages, in
addition to any other damages authorized by this chapter or by other law, to a
person whose conversation or communication was intercepted, transmitted, or
recorded pursuant to an authorization under this section if:

(a) In a review under
subsection (7) of this section, or in a suppression of evidence proceeding, it
has been determined that the authorization was made without the probable cause
required by subsection (1)(b) of this section; and

(b) The authorization
was also made without a reasonable suspicion that the conversation or
communication would involve the unlawful acts identified in subsection (1)(b)
of this section.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
5. A new section is added
to chapter 9.73 RCW to read as follows:

(1) This section
applies to pen registers and traps and traces as defined in section 7 of this
act when used to obtain information regarding an act of terrorism.

(2) An investigative or
law enforcement officer may seek and the superior court may issue orders and
extensions of orders authorizing the installation or application and use of pen
registers and traps and traces as provided in this section. The request for an
order shall be under oath and shall include the identity of the officer seeking
the order and the identity of the law enforcement agency conducting the
investigation. The officer must certify that the information likely to be
obtained is relevant to an ongoing criminal investigation of terrorism being
conducted by that agency.

(3) If the court finds
that the information likely to be obtained by such installation or application
and use is relevant to an ongoing criminal investigation of terrorism and finds
that there is probable cause to believe that the pen register or trap and trace
will lead to obtaining evidence of terrorism, contraband, fruits of crime,
things criminally possessed, weapons, or other things by means of which an act of
terrorism has been committed or reasonably appears about to be committed, or
will lead to learning the location of a person who is unlawfully restrained or
reasonably believed to be a witness in an investigation of such an act or for
whose arrest there is probable cause, the court shall enter an ex parte order
authorizing the installation or application and use of a pen register or a trap
and trace. The order shall specify:

(a) The identity, if
known, of the person to whom is leased or in whose name is listed the telephone
line or other instrument or facility to which the pen register or trap and
trace is to be attached or applied;

(b) The identity, if
known, of the person who is the subject of the criminal investigation;

(c) The attributes of
the communications to which the order applies, including the number or other
identifier and, if known, the location of the telephone line or other
instrument or facility to which the pen register or trap and trace is to be
attached or applied, and, in the case of a trap and trace, the geographic
limits of the trap and trace; and

(d) A statement of the
act of terrorism to which the information likely to be obtained by the pen
register or trap and trace relates.

The order shall direct,
if the applicant has requested, the furnishing of information, facilities, and
technical assistance necessary to accomplish the installation of the pen
register or trap and trace. An order issued under this section shall authorize
the installation or application and use of a pen register or a trap and trace
for a period not to exceed sixty days. An extension of the original order may
only be granted upon: A new request for an order under subsection (2) of this
section; and a showing that there is a probability that the information or
items sought under this subsection are more likely to be obtained under the
extension than under the original order. No extension beyond the first
extension shall be granted unless: There is a showing that there is a high
probability that the information or items sought under this subsection are much
more likely to be obtained under the second or subsequent extension than under
the original order; and there are extraordinary circumstances such as a direct
and immediate danger of death or serious bodily injury to a law enforcement
officer. The period of extension shall be for a period not to exceed sixty
days.

An order authorizing or
approving the installation or application and use of a pen register or a trap
and trace shall direct that the order be sealed until otherwise ordered by the
court and that the person owning or leasing the line or other facility to which
the pen register or trap and trace is attached or applied, or who has been
ordered by the court to provide assistance to the applicant, not disclose the
existence of the pen register or trap and trace or the existence of the
investigation to the listed subscriber or to any other person, unless or until
otherwise ordered by the court.

(4) Upon the
presentation of an order, entered under subsection (3) of this section, by an
officer of a law enforcement agency authorized to install or apply and use a
pen register under this chapter, a provider of wire or electronic communication
service, landlord, custodian, or other person shall furnish such law
enforcement officer forthwith all information, facilities, and technical
assistance necessary to accomplish the installation or application of the pen
register unobtrusively and with a minimum of interference with the services
that the person so ordered by the court accords the party with respect to whom
the installation or application and use is to take place, if such assistance is
directed by a court order as provided in subsection (3) of this section.

Upon the request of an
officer of a law enforcement agency authorized to receive the results of a trap
and trace under this chapter, a provider of a wire or electronic communication
service, landlord, custodian, or other person shall install or apply the trap
and trace forthwith on the appropriate line or other facility and shall furnish
such law enforcement officer all additional information, facilities, and
technical assistance including installation or application and operation of the
device unobtrusively and with a minimum of interference with the services that
the person so ordered by the court accords the party with respect to whom the
installation or application and use is to take place, if such installation or
application and assistance is directed by a court order as provided in
subsection (3) of this section. Unless otherwise ordered by the court, the
results of the trap and trace shall be furnished to the officer of a law
enforcement agency, designated in the court order, at reasonable intervals
during regular business hours for the duration of the order.

A provider of a wire or
electronic communication service, landlord, custodian, or other person who
furnishes facilities or technical assistance pursuant to this subsection shall
be reasonably compensated by the law enforcement agency that requests the
facilities or assistance for such reasonable expenses incurred in providing
such facilities and assistance.

No cause of action
shall lie in any court against any provider of a wire or electronic
communication service, its officers, employees, agents, or other specified
persons for providing information, facilities, or assistance in accordance with
the terms of a court order under this section. A good faith reliance on a
court order under this section, a request pursuant to this section, a
legislative authorization, or a statutory authorization is a complete defense
against any civil or criminal action brought under this chapter or any other
law.

(5)(a) Notwithstanding
any other provision of this chapter, a law enforcement officer and a
prosecuting attorney or deputy prosecuting attorney who jointly and reasonably
determine that there is probable cause to believe that an emergency situation
exists that involves immediate danger of death or serious bodily injury to any
person that requires the installation or application and use of a pen register
or a trap and trace before an order authorizing such installation or
application and use can, with due diligence, be obtained, and there are grounds
upon which an order could be entered under this chapter to authorize such
installation or application and use, may have installed or applied and use a
pen register or trap and trace if, within forty-eight hours after the
installation or application has occurred, or begins to occur, an order
approving the installation or application or use is sought and issued in
accordance with subsection (3) of this section. In the absence of an
authorizing order, such use shall immediately terminate when the information sought
is obtained, when the request for the order is denied, or when forty-eight
hours have lapsed since the installation or application of the pen register or
trap and trace, whichever is earlier. If an order approving the installation,
application, or use is not obtained within forty-eight hours, any information
obtained is not admissible as evidence in any legal proceeding. The knowing
installation, application, or use by any law enforcement officer of a pen
register or trap and trace pursuant to this subsection without seeking the
authorizing order within forty-eight hours of the installation or application
of the pen register or trap and trace shall constitute a violation of this
chapter and be punishable as a gross misdemeanor. A provider of a wire or
electronic communication service, landlord, custodian, or other person who
furnished facilities or technical assistance pursuant to this subsection shall
be reasonably compensated by the law enforcement agency that requests the
facilities or assistance for such reasonable expenses incurred in providing
such facilities and assistance.

(b) A law enforcement
agency that authorizes the installation or application of a pen register or
trap and trace under this subsection (5) shall file a monthly report with the
administrator for the courts. The report shall indicate the number of
authorizations made, the date and time of each authorization, whether a court
authorization was sought within forty-eight hours, and whether a subsequent
court authorization was granted.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
6. A new section is added
to chapter 9.73 RCW to read as follows:

(1)(a) Any
investigative or law enforcement officer who, by any means authorized by this
section or section 3 or 4 of this act, has obtained knowledge of the contents
of any wire, oral, or electronic communication, or evidence derived from such
contents, may disclose such contents or derivative evidence to another
investigative or law enforcement officer, including an investigative or law
enforcement officer of another state, to the extent that such disclosure is
appropriate to the proper performance of the official duties of the officer
making or receiving the disclosure; or

(b) Any investigative
or law enforcement officer who, by any means authorized by this section or
section 5 of this act, has obtained information from a pen register or trap and
trace, or evidence derived from such information, may disclose such contents or
derivative evidence to another investigative or law enforcement officer,
including an investigative or law enforcement officer of another state, to the
extent that such disclosure is appropriate to the proper performance of the
official duties of the officer making or receiving the disclosure.

(2)(a) Any
investigative or law enforcement officer who, by any means authorized by this
section or section 3 or 4 of this act, has obtained knowledge of the contents
of any wire, oral, or electronic communication, or evidence derived from such
contents, may use such contents or derivative evidence to the extent such use
is appropriate to the proper performance of his or her official duties.

(b) Any investigative
or law enforcement officer who, by any means authorized by this section or
section 5 of this act, has obtained information from a pen register or trap and
trace, or evidence derived from such information, may use such information or
derivative evidence to the extent such use is appropriate to the proper
performance of his or her official duties.

(3)(a) Any person who,
by any means authorized by this section or section 3 or 4 of this act, has
received any information concerning the contents of a wire, oral, or electronic
communication, or evidence derived from such contents, intercepted in
accordance with section 3 or 4 of this act, may disclose such contents or
derivative evidence while giving testimony under oath or affirmation in any proceeding
held under the authority of this state or any political subdivision of this
state.

(b) Any person who, by
any means authorized by this section or section 5 of this act, has received
information obtained from a pen register or trap and trace or evidence derived
from such information, may disclose such information or derivative evidence
while giving testimony under oath or affirmation in any proceeding held under
the authority of this state or any political subdivision of this state.

(4)(a) When an
investigative or law enforcement officer, while engaged in intercepting wire,
oral, or electronic communications in the manner authorized in section 3 or 4
of this act, intercepts wire, oral, or electronic communications relating to an
offense other than an offense specified in the order of authorization, the
contents of the communications, and evidence derived from the contents, may be
disclosed or used as provided in subsections (1) and (2) of this section. Such
contents and derivative evidence may be used under subsection (3) of this
section when authorized by a superior court where the court finds on subsequent
application that the contents were otherwise intercepted in accordance with the
provisions of section 3 or 4 of this act. Such application shall be made as
soon as practicable.

(b) When an
investigative or law enforcement officer, while engaged in obtaining
information by any means authorized by section 5 of this act, obtains
information from a pen register or trap and trace relating to an offense other
than an offense specified in the authorizing order, the information and
evidence derived from it may be disclosed or used as provided in subsections
(1) and (2) of this section. Such information and derivative evidence may be
used under subsection (3) of this section when authorized by a superior court
where the court finds on subsequent application that the information was
otherwise obtained in accordance with section 5 of this act. Such application
shall be made as soon as practicable.

(5)(a) Any
investigative or law enforcement officer, or attorney for the state or any
political subdivision of the state, who by any means authorized by this section
or section 3 or 4 of this act has obtained knowledge of the contents of any
wire, oral, or electronic communication, or evidence derived from such
contents, may also disclose such contents or derivative evidence to any federal
intelligence, protective, immigration, national defense, or national security
official to the extent that such contents or derivative evidence includes
foreign intelligence or counterintelligence, as defined in section 3 of the
National Security Act of 1947, 50 U.S.C. Sec. 401(a), or foreign intelligence
information, as defined in subsection (19) of 18 U.S.C. Sec. 2510, to assist
the official who is to receive that information in the performance of his or
her official duties. Any federal official who receives information pursuant to
this provision may use that information only as necessary in the conduct of
that person's official duties subject to any limitations on the unauthorized
disclosure of such information.

(b) Any investigative
or law enforcement officer, or attorney for the state or any political
subdivision of the state, who by any means authorized by this section or section
5 of this act has obtained information from a pen register or trap and trace or
evidence derived from such information, may also disclose such information or
derivative evidence to any federal intelligence, protective, immigration,
national defense, or national security official to the extent that such
information or derivative evidence includes foreign intelligence or
counterintelligence, as defined in section 3 of the National Security Act of
1947, 50 U.S.C. Sec. 401(a), or foreign intelligence information, as defined in
subsection (19) of 18 U.S.C. Sec. 2510, to assist the official who is to
receive that information in the performance of his or her official duties. Any
federal official who receives information pursuant to this provision may use that
information only as necessary in the conduct of that person's official duties
subject to any limitations on the unauthorized disclosure of such information.

(6) Any federal
investigative or law enforcement officer who obtains information regarding an act
of terrorism from the contents of a wire, oral, or electronic communication or
obtains such information from the installation or application of a pen register
or trap and trace, or obtains any evidence derived from such information, may
disclose such information or derivative evidence while giving testimony under
oath or affirmation in any proceeding held under the authority of this state or
any political subdivision of this state, if such information or derivative
evidence was obtained in compliance with federal law, and in a case in which no
party to a communication has consented to an interception, if such information
or derivative evidence was obtained through an interception that was also done
with prior judicial authorization whether or not such prior authorization was
required by federal law.

(7) No otherwise
privileged wire, oral, or electronic communication intercepted in accordance
with, or in violation of, the provisions of this act shall lose its privileged
character.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
7. A new section is added
to chapter 9.73 RCW to read as follows:

As used in sections 2
through 6 of this act, the following terms have the following meanings:

(1) "Act of
terrorism" means any of the following offenses, or conspiracy to commit
any of the following offenses, as they are defined in Title 9A RCW:

(a) Terrorism in the
first degree;

(b) Terrorism in the
second degree;

(c) Unlawful use or
possession of a weapon of mass destruction; or

(d) Threatening acts of
terrorism in the first degree.

(2) "Aggrieved
person" means a person who was a party to any intercepted wire, oral, or
electronic communication or a person against whom the interception was
directed.

(3)
"Computer" means an electronic, magnetic, optical, electrochemical,
or other high speed data processing device performing logical, arithmetic, or
storage functions, and includes any data storage facility or communications
facility directly related to or operating in conjunction with such device, but
such term does not include an automated typewriter or typesetter, a portable
handheld calculator, or other similar device.

(4)
"Contents," when used with respect to any wire, oral, or electronic
communication, includes any information concerning the substance, purport, or
meaning of that communication.

(5) "Electronic
communication" means any transfer of signs, signals, writing, images,
sounds, data, or intelligence of any nature transmitted in whole or in part by
a wire, radio, electromagnetic, photoelectronic, or photooptical system, but
does not include:

(a) Any wire or oral
communication;

(b) Any communication
made through a tone-only paging device;

(c) Any communication
from a tracking device;

(d) Electronic funds
transfer information stored by a financial institution in an electronic
communication system used for the electronic storage and transfer of funds.

(6) "Electronic
communication service" means any service which provides users the ability
to send or receive wire or electronic communications.

(7) "Electronic
communication system" means any wire, radio, electromagnetic,
photooptical, or photoelectronic facilities for the transmission of wire or
electronic communications, and any computer facilities or related electronic equipment
for the electronic storage of such communications.

(8) "Electronic
storage" means (a) any temporary, intermediate storage of a wire or
electronic communication incidental to the electronic transmission thereof; and
(b) any storage of such communication by an electronic communication service
for purposes of backup protection of such communication.

(9) "Investigative
or law enforcement officer" means any officer of the United States or of
this state or a political subdivision of this state, who is empowered by law to
conduct investigations of or make arrest for criminal offenses enumerated in
the United States Code of laws of this state, and any attorney authorized by
law to prosecute or participate in the prosecution of such offenses.

(10) "Oral communication"
means any oral communication uttered by a person exhibiting an expectation that
such communication is not subject to interception under circumstances
justifying such expectation, but such term does not include any electronic
communication.

(11) "Pen
register" means a device which records or decodes dialing, routing,
addressing, or signaling information transmitted by an instrument or facility
from which a wire or electronic communication is transmitted if the device does
not record or decode the contents of any communication, but the term does not
include any device used by a provider or customer of a wire or electronic
communication service for billing, or recording as an incident to billing, for
communications services provided by such provider or any device used by a
provider or customer of a wire communication service for cost accounting or
other like purposes in the ordinary course of its business.

(12) "Trap and
trace" means a device or process which captures the incoming electronic or
other impulses which identify the originating number or other dialing, routing,
addressing, and signaling information reasonably likely to identify the source
of a wire or electronic communication, but which device or process does not
capture the contents of any communication.

(13) "User"
means any person or entity who (a) uses an electronic communication service;
and (b) is duly authorized by the provider of such service to engage in such
use.

(14) "Wire
communication" means any transfer of the human voice made in whole or in
part through the use of facilities for the transmission of communications by
the aid of wire, cable, or other like connection between the point of origin
and the point of reception, including the use of such connection in a switching
station, furnished or operated by any person engaged in providing or operating
such facilities for the transmission of intrastate, interstate, or foreign
communications.

Sec. 8. RCW 9.73.240 and 1989 c
271 s 206 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) The attorney
general shall have concurrent authority and power with the prosecuting
attorneys to investigate violations of RCW 9.73.200 through 9.73.230 ((or
RCW)), 9.73.090, or sections 2 through 6 of this act and
initiate and conduct prosecutions of any violations upon request of any of the
following:

(a) The person who was
the nonconsenting party to the intercepted, transmitted, or recorded
conversation or communication; or

(b) The county
prosecuting attorney of the jurisdiction in which the offense has occurred.

(2) The
request shall be communicated in writing to the attorney general.

---
END ---