BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF
WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec.
1. A new section is added
to chapter 46.04 RCW to read as follows:

"Electric personal
assistive mobility device" (EPAMD) means a self-balancing device with two
wheels not in tandem, designed to transport only one person by an electric
propulsion system with an average power of seven hundred fifty watts (one
horsepower) having a maximum speed on a paved level surface, when powered
solely by such a propulsion system while ridden by an operator weighing one
hundred seventy pounds, of less than twenty miles per hour.

Sec. 2. RCW 46.04.320 and 1961 c
12 s 46.04.320 are each amended to read as follows:

"Motor
vehicle" shall mean every vehicle which is self-propelled and every
vehicle which is propelled by electric power obtained from overhead trolley
wires, but not operated upon rails. An electric personal assistive mobility
device is not considered a motor vehicle.

Sec. 3. RCW 46.04.330 and 1990 c
250 s 20 are each amended to read as follows:

"Motorcycle"
means a motor vehicle designed to travel on not more than three wheels in
contact with the ground, on which the driver rides astride the motor unit or
power train and is designed to be steered with a handle bar, but excluding a
farm tractor, an electric personal assistive mobility device, and a
moped.

The
Washington state patrol may approve of and define as a "motorcycle" a
motor vehicle that fails to meet these specific criteria, but that is
essentially similar in performance and application to motor vehicles that do
meet these specific criteria.

Sec. 4. RCW 46.04.332 and 1979
ex.s. c 213 s 3 are each amended to read as follows:

"Motor-driven
cycle" means every motorcycle((, including every motor scooter,))
with a motor ((which)) that produces not to exceed five brake
horsepower (developed by a prime mover, as measured by a brake applied to the
driving shaft). A motor-driven cycle does not include a moped or an
electric personal assistive mobility device.

Sec. 5. RCW 46.04.670 and 1994 c
262 s 2 are each amended to read as follows:

"Vehicle"
includes every device capable of being moved upon a public highway and in,
upon, or by which any persons or property is or may be transported or drawn
upon a public highway, including bicycles. The term does not include devices
other than bicycles moved by human or animal power or used exclusively upon
stationary rails or tracks. Mopeds shall not be considered vehicles or motor
vehicles for the purposes of chapter 46.70 RCW. Bicycles shall not be
considered vehicles for the purposes of chapter 46.12, 46.16, or 46.70 RCW. Electric
personal assistive mobility devices are not considered vehicles or motor
vehicles for the purposes of chapter 46.12, 46.16, 46.29, 46.37, or 46.70 RCW.

Sec. 6. RCW 46.20.500 and 1999 c
274 s 8 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) No person
may drive a motorcycle or a motor-driven cycle unless such person has a valid
driver's license specially endorsed by the director to enable the holder to
drive such vehicles.

(2) However, a
person sixteen years of age or older, holding a valid driver's license of any
class issued by the state of the person's residence, may operate a moped
without taking any special examination for the operation of a moped.

(3) No driver's
license is required for operation of an electric-assisted bicycle if the
operator is at least sixteen years of age. Persons under sixteen years of age
may not operate an electric-assisted bicycle.

(4) No driver's
license is required to operate an electric personal assistive mobility device.

Sec. 7. RCW 46.61.710 and 1997 c
328 s 5 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) No person shall
operate a moped upon the highways of this state unless the moped has been
assigned a moped registration number and displays a moped permit in accordance
with the provisions of RCW 46.16.630.

(2) Notwithstanding any
other provision of law, a moped may not be operated on a bicycle path or trail,
bikeway, equestrian trail, or hiking or recreational trail.

(3) Operation of a
moped, electric personal assistive mobility device, or an
electric-assisted bicycle on a fully controlled limited access highway ((or
on a sidewalk)) is unlawful. Operation of a moped or an
electric-assisted bicycle on a sidewalk is unlawful.

(4) Removal of any
muffling device or pollution control device from a moped is unlawful.

(5) Subsections (1),
(2), and (4) of this section do not apply to electric-assisted bicycles.
Electric-assisted bicycles may have access to highways of the state to the same
extent as bicycles. Electric-assisted bicycles may be operated on a
multipurpose trail or bicycle lane, but local jurisdictions may restrict or
otherwise limit the access of electric-assisted bicycles.

(6) A person
operating an electric personal assistive mobility device (EPAMD) shall obey all
speed limits and shall yield the right-of-way to pedestrians and human-powered
devices at all times. An operator must also give an audible signal before
overtaking and passing a pedestrian. Except for the limitations of this
subsection, persons operating an EPAMD have all the rights and duties of a
pedestrian.

(7) A municipality
may prohibit the operation of an EPAMD on public highways within its
jurisdiction where the speed limit is greater than twenty-five miles per hour,
but may not otherwise restrict the operation of an EPAMD.

Sec. 8. RCW 35.75.020 and 1965 c
7 s 35.75.020 are each amended to read as follows:

It shall
be unlawful for any person to lead, drive, ride, or propel any team,
wagon, animal, or vehicle other than a bicycle, electric personal assistive
mobility device, or similar vehicle upon and along any bicycle path
constructed within or without the corporate limits of any city or town
excepting at suitable crossings to be provided in the construction of such
paths. Any person violating the provisions of this section shall be guilty of
a misdemeanor.

---
END ---