BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF
WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec.
1. A new section is added
to chapter 19.86 RCW to read as follows:

The legislature finds
that consumers are vulnerable to price gouging or clearly excessive pricing
during times of abnormal market conditions caused by significant disruptions,
emergencies, or disasters. The legislature declares that excessive and
unjustified increases in retail prices charged during abnormal market
conditions as defined in section 2 of this act should be prohibited and made
subject to civil remedies.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
2. A new section is added
to chapter 19.86 RCW to read as follows:

The definitions in this
section apply throughout sections 1 through 4 of this act unless the context
clearly requires otherwise.

(1) "Abnormal
market conditions" means those instances of significant disruption to the
marketplace caused by terrorist acts, civil disorder, war, or military action.

(2) "Person"
has the same meaning as provided under RCW 19.86.010.

(3) "Essential
consumer good or service" means a retail good or service that is used,
bought, or rendered primarily for personal, family, or household purposes, and
is necessary for consumption or use during a period of abnormal market
condition, including food items; emergency supplies; medical supplies; building
materials; fuel; transportation services; storage services; and temporary
housing.

(4) "Food
item" means any article that is used or intended for use for food or drink
by a person or animal.

(5) "Emergency
supplies" includes but is not limited to water, flashlights, fire
extinguishers, radios, batteries, candles, blankets, soaps, diapers, temporary
shelters, tape, toiletries, and portable fossil‑fueled electric
generators.

(6) "Medical
supplies" includes but is not limited to prescription and nonprescription
medications, bandages, gauze, isopropyl alcohol, and antibacterial products.

(7) "Building
materials" includes lumber, construction tools, nails, windows, and other
products used to protect, repair, build, or rebuild property.

(8) "Fuel"
includes oil or propane used for home heating, or any fuel used to power any
motor vehicle, portable electric generator, or power tool.

(9)
"Transportation services" includes any service that is performed by
any person who contracts to move or transport persons or personal or business
property, or rents equipment for such purposes.

(10) "Storage
services" includes any service that is performed by any person who
contracts to store personal or business property or rents equipment for such
purposes.

(11) "Temporary
housing" includes any rental housing or office space leased on a temporary
or short-term basis to a person who has been displaced from his or her
dwelling, housing, or office space because of a significant disruption, emergency,
or disaster.

(12) "Emergency
cleanup, repair, or reconstruction services" means services provided and
equipment used to clear or remove debris or other material that poses a public
safety or health hazard and to repair residential or commercial property of any
type to a safe and habitable condition.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
3. A new section is added
to chapter 19.86 RCW to read as follows:

(1) In addition to the
powers in chapters 43.06 and 38.52 RCW for the governor to make disaster or
emergency proclamations, for purposes of triggering the provisions in sections
1 through 4 of this act, the governor is also hereby empowered to make and to
rescind a proclamation of an abnormal market condition as defined in section 2
of this act.

(2) Upon the
proclamation by the governor under sections 1 through 4 of this act of an
abnormal market condition, and for a period of thirty days following the
proclamation, or a lesser time period if the proclamation is rescinded, it is
unlawful for any person to sell or offer to sell at retail any essential
consumer good or service within the area designated in the proclamation at a
clearly excessive increase in price above the price charged by that person for
such goods or services immediately prior to the proclamation as specified in
section 4 of this act.

(3) Upon the
proclamation by the governor under sections 1 through 4 of this act of an
abnormal market condition, and for a period of ninety days following the
proclamation, or a lesser time period if the proclamation is rescinded, it is
unlawful for any person to sell or offer to sell at retail any emergency
cleanup, repair, or reconstruction service within the area designated in the
proclamation at a clearly excessive increase in price above the price charged
by that person for such goods or services immediately prior to the proclamation
as defined in section 4 of this act.

(4) An increase in
price is not unlawful if the higher price charged reflected reasonable expenses
in addition to the prior price of the goods or services but such reasonable
expenses are limited to those which are necessarily incurred in procuring or
delivering such goods and services during the period of time set forth in
subsections (2) and (3) of this section. A price increase in excess of fifteen
percent not tied to the reasonable expenses necessarily incurred in procuring
or delivering an essential consumer good or service during the period of time
set forth in subsections (2) and (3) of this section is prima facie evidence of
a clearly excessive price increase.

(5) Any person who sold
or had offered to sell an essential consumer good or service, or emergency
cleanup, repair, or reconstruction service at a temporarily discounted or
reduced price immediately prior to the proclamation as set forth in this
section may use the price at which the person normally or usually sold the good
or service for purposes of determining whether a price increase violates
sections 1 through 4 of this act.

(6) The governor may
extend the time periods set forth in subsections (2) and (3) of this section
for additional thirty-day periods by issuing a renewed proclamation, upon a
finding that the abnormal market condition continues and that any such
extension is deemed necessary to protect the health, safety, or welfare of the
citizens of the state.

(7) The governor may
rescind an emergency proclamation made in accordance with subsection (1) of
this section upon a finding that no abnormal market conditions exist.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
4. A new section is added
to chapter 19.86 RCW to read as follows:

(1) The legislature
finds that the practices covered by sections 1 through 4 of this act are
matters vitally affecting the public interest. A violation of sections 1
through 4 of this act is not reasonable in relation to the development and
preservation of business and is an unfair or deceptive practice in trade or
commerce and an unfair method of competition.

(2) The provisions of
sections 1 through 4 of this act do not apply to persons whose activities or
transactions as to prices for goods or services are subject to regulation by
the Washington utilities and transportation commission or the federal energy
regulatory commission.

(3) Persons who merely
provide advertising and related services for persons engaged in making offers
to sell goods or perform services shall not be deemed to be making any offer to
sell any goods or perform any services for purposes of sections 1 through 4 of
this act.

(4) In any action against
a person under the provisions of sections 1 through 4 of this act, the
defendant shall be deemed not to have violated sections 1 through 4 of this act
if the defendant proves all of the following:

(a) The violation of
the price limitation was unintentional;

(b) The defendant
voluntarily rolled back prices to a level permitted under sections 1 through 4
of this act upon discovering that this section was or may have been violated;
and

(c) The defendant has
instituted a restitution program for all consumers who may have paid excessive
prices.

(5) Subsequent remedial
measures are not admissible as evidence of a violation of sections 1 through 4
of this act.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 5. This act shall be known
as the "Preventing Price Gouging During Emergencies and Disasters
Act."

---
END ---