BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF
WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec.
1. The legislature finds
that Washington state's statutes governing the issuance of driver's licenses
are subject to fraud by individuals who seek to obtain a driver's license or
identity card using a false identity. In order to prevent criminals and
terrorists from obtaining a Washington driver's license using a false identity,
the legislature has determined that, in addition to the current proof of
identity required by statute, applicants for a Washington driver's license
should demonstrate that the applicant's presence in the United States is
authorized under federal law, either by demonstrating United States citizenship
or by showing legal immigration status. The legislature further finds that the
department should be explicitly authorized to verify Social Security numbers of
applicants for a Washington state driver's license, and that current Washington
statutes could be interpreted as forbidding the department from verifying
Social Security numbers with the federal government.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
2. This act may be known and
cited as the Driver's License Security Act of 2002.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
3. A new section is added
to chapter 46.20 RCW to read as follows:

(1) Notwithstanding any
other provision of law, and in addition to the proof of identity required by
RCW 46.20.035, the department shall require every applicant for an original
driver's license or identification card to submit satisfactory proof that the
applicant's presence in the United States is authorized under federal law.

(2) The department
shall not issue an original driver's license or identification card to a person
who does not submit satisfactory proof that the applicant's presence in the
United States is authorized under federal law.

(3) The department
shall adopt rules specifying procedures for verifying that the applicant's
presence in the United States is authorized under federal law, including
appropriate documentation of that status.

(4) On November 1, 2003,
and on November 1st of each subsequent year, the department shall submit a
report to the governor and the legislature detailing the costs of verifying the
citizenship or legal residency of applicants for driver's licenses and
identification cards, in order for the state to request reimbursement from the
federal government.

(5) The inability to
obtain a driver's license under this section does not abrogate or diminish in
any respect the legal requirement of every driver in this state to obey the
motor vehicle laws of this state, including laws with respect to licensing,
motor vehicle registration, and financial responsibility.

Sec. 4. RCW 46.20.091 and 2000 c
115 s 4 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) Application.
In order to apply for a driver's license or instruction permit the applicant
must provide his or her:

(a) Name of record, as
established by documentation required under RCW 46.20.035;

(b) Date of birth, as
established by satisfactory evidence of age;

(c) Sex;

(d) Washington
residence address;

(e) Description;

(f) Driving licensing
history, including:

(i) Whether the
applicant has ever been licensed as a driver or chauffeur and, if so, (A) when
and by what state or country; (B) whether the license has ever been suspended
or revoked; and (C) the date of and reason for the suspension or revocation; or

(ii) Whether the
applicant's application to another state or country for a driver's license has
ever been refused and, if so, the date of and reason for the refusal; ((and))

(g) Social Security
number; and

(h) Any
additional information required by the department.

(2) Sworn statement.
An application for an instruction permit or for an original driver's license
must be made upon a form provided by the department. The form must include a
section for the applicant to indicate whether he or she has received driver
training and, if so, where. The identifying documentation verifying the name
of record must be accompanied by the applicant's written statement that it is
valid. The information provided on the form must be sworn to and signed by the
applicant before a person authorized to administer oaths. An applicant who
makes a false statement on an application for a driver's license or instruction
permit is guilty of false swearing, a gross misdemeanor, under RCW 9A.72.040.

(3) Driving records
from other jurisdictions. If a person previously licensed in another
jurisdiction applies for a Washington driver's license, the department shall
request a copy of the applicant's driver's record from the other jurisdiction.
The driving record from the other jurisdiction becomes a part of the driver's
record in this state.

(4) Driving records
to other jurisdictions. If another jurisdiction requests a copy of a person's
Washington driver's record, the department shall provide a copy of the record.
The department shall forward the record without charge if the other
jurisdiction extends the same privilege to the state of Washington. Otherwise
the department shall charge a reasonable fee for transmittal of the record.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
5. A new section is added
to chapter 46.20 RCW to read as follows:

The
department shall verify the Social Security number of an applicant for a
Washington state driver's license or identicard with the federal Social
Security Administration. This section constitutes a required disclosure of
Social Security numbers under RCW 26.23.150.

---
END ---