BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF
WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1. RCW 46.61.165 and 1999 c
206 s 1 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) The state
department of transportation and the local authorities are authorized to ((reserve))
designate all or any portion of any highway under their respective
jurisdictions, including any designated lane or ramp, as green lanes. Green
lanes will be for the exclusive or preferential use of ((public
transportation vehicles or private motor vehicles carrying no fewer than a
specified number of passengers)) the following vehicles when such
limitations will increase the efficient ((utilization)) use
of the highway or will aid in the conservation of energy resources:

(a) Public
transportation vehicles;

(b) Private motor
vehicles carrying no fewer than a specified number of passengers;

(c) Private motor
vehicles whose average gasoline mileage is at least twice the national average
for passenger cars, as that figure is determined by the United States
environmental protection agency; or

(d) Private motor
vehicles that have been designated as green vehicles by the department of
transportation.

(2) Regulations
authorizing such exclusive or preferential use of a highway facility may be
declared to be effective at all times or at specified times of day or on
specified days.

(3) The department
of transportation must designate a vehicle as a green vehicle and cause the
name of its owner and its license plate number to be listed on the internet and
on applicable law enforcement computers in this state, if a registered owner of
the vehicle:

(a) Permanently
mitigates the greenhouse gas emissions emitted by that vehicle in this state by
annually paying a fee, as determined by the department of transportation under
subsection (4) of this section, at the time of vehicle registration or renewal to
the Washington State University energy program for the study of the climate and
rural energy development; and

(b) Remits a fee, as
determined by the department of transportation under subsection (4) of this
section, at the time of vehicle registration or renewal to support mass transit
for low-income riders.

(4) The fees
associated with a green vehicle designation under subsection (3) of this
section must be determined by the department of transportation. In
establishing these fees, the department of transportation may consult with any
public or private institution, including, but not limited to, the department of
ecology, the office of trade and economic development, the utilities and
transportation commission, and the Washington state energy program. All money
collected by the fee must be distributed equitably among the local transit
agencies of the state to be used only to subsidize mass transit fares for
low-income riders.

(5) The department
will issue a highly visible green decal to be attached near the license plate
to vehicles that qualify under subsection (1)(c) and (d) of this section. This
decal will be issued annually at the time of the vehicle's license renewal if
that vehicle meets the requirements for the upcoming license year. Presence of
this decal is necessary for the vehicle to use a green lane. Vehicles that
otherwise meet the requirements of subsection (1)(c) or (d) of this section
that fail to display the decal may be cited for a traffic infraction under
subsection (6) of this section.

(6) Violation of
a restriction of highway usage prescribed by the appropriate authority under
this section is a traffic infraction.

Sec. 2. RCW 47.52.025 and 1974
ex.s. c 133 s 1 are each amended to read as follows:

Highway
authorities of the state, counties, and incorporated cities and towns, in
addition to the specific powers granted in this chapter, shall also have, and
may exercise, relative to limited access facilities, any and all additional
authority, now or hereafter vested in them relative to highways or streets
within their respective jurisdictions, and may regulate, restrict, or prohibit
the use of such limited access facilities by various classes of vehicles or
traffic. Such highway authorities may ((reserve)) designate any
limited access facility or portions thereof, including designated lanes or
ramps as green lanes for the exclusive or preferential use of ((public
transportation vehicles, privately owned buses, or private motor vehicles
carrying not less than a specified number of passengers)) vehicles
authorized under RCW 46.61.165 to use green lanes when such limitation will
increase the efficient utilization of the highway facility or will aid in the
conservation of energy resources. Regulations authorizing such exclusive or
preferential use of a highway facility may be declared to be effective at all
time or at specified times of day or on specified days.

---
END ---