BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF
WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec.
1. (1) The director, in
consultation with the WISHA advisory committee established by RCW 49.17.055,
shall establish a program to provide safety and health impact grants to prevent
injuries and illnesses, save lives, and educate Washington employees and
employers about workplace hazards and safe workplace practices. The intent of
this act is to benefit, in the broadest sense possible, Washington workers and
employers, especially those who are in small business and may lack the injury
and illness prevention resources that larger companies may possess. The
department may use industrial insurance funds provided in a proviso in an
omnibus appropriations act, or in an appropriation clause in a bill, that
specifically references funding to accomplish the purposes of this act.
Funding for this program will be taken from the medical aid fund reserves which
are in excess of actuarial needs.

(2) Using a competitive
application process, the department shall award safety and health impact grants
to trade associations, business associations, employers, employee
organizations, labor unions, and groups of employees. Educational institutions
and self-insured employers shall not directly receive grants but may
participate in partnership with other eligible grantees if the product of the
grant will significantly benefit employees and employers who belong to the
state industrial insurance fund. Grants may include:

(a) Education and
training grants to implement safety and health and to provide practical
information, curricula, materials, and methods intended for use by employers
and employees in reducing workplace hazards;

(b) Technical
innovation grants to develop engineering and other technical solutions to
injury and illness problems; or

(c) Grants for the
application of hazard control.

(3) The department
shall make significant efforts to ensure that not less than twenty percent of
available grant funds are used for grants whose activities or products are
intended to assist and benefit employers and employees in small businesses that
employ fewer than fifty employees.

(4) Any materials,
designs, or equipment developed under these grants will be in the public domain
and may not be copyrighted or patented. Any materials or designs developed
under these grants must be provided to the department at no charge as a
condition of grant receipt.

(5) Grant funds may not
be used to support or develop specific legislative or regulatory initiatives.

(6) The department
shall not use information in a grant application or developed as a result of
grant activities:

(a) To initiate
developing a new rule or revising an existing rule. This grant program does
not change any of the rule-making requirements of the administrative procedure
act;

(b) To initiate
department activity at a grantee's worksite other than monitoring or evaluation
visits intended to review the grant itself. To the extent a worksite is
directly affected by a grant, the worksite must be treated the same as a
worksite having a consultation visit under this chapter; or

(c) To establish the
existence of a recognized hazard.

(7) Information
contained in a grant application or developed as a result of grant activities
is inadmissible in any civil action proceedings in a court of general or
limited jurisdiction, or in any administrative proceedings, in this state,
except in proceedings:

(a) Under section 3(3)
of this act; or

(b) Related to fraud
perpetrated in the grant process.

(8) To ensure
accountability, each grant must include methods by which to measure progress
toward completion of the grant and at least one appropriate measurable outcome
related to injury and illness reduction, hazard reduction, or safety and health
awareness that will be the result of the grant award. The evaluation shall
address both positive and negative impacts and costs. The department may
assist grant recipients by providing available data needed to measure
accountability.

(9) No grant
application may be approved that proposes work that cannot be completed during
the current application year or biennium. Grant recipients may apply for
funding for continuation of grant work in subsequent years only if they have
successfully completed the work for which they were previously funded as
determined by the department.

(10) During the
biennium ending June 30, 2003, no grant may be awarded that exceeds two hundred
fifty thousand dollars per fiscal year. The WISHA advisory committee and the
safety and health impact grant review committee may recommend future increases
or decreases to the funding level.

(11) No grant may be
used to fund a grantee's on-going business operations including routine
expenses of a grantee.

(12) No grant recipient
may charge more than ten percent of the total grant award for administrative
expenses or indirect costs.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
2. (1) The director shall
appoint a safety and health impact grant review committee that will be a
subcommittee of the WISHA advisory committee. The review committee is composed
of nine members: Four members representing employees, each appointed from a
list of at least three names per position, submitted by recognized statewide
organizations of employees; four members representing employers, including at
least one representing small employers that employ fewer than fifty employees,
each appointed from a list of at least three names per position, submitted by
recognized statewide organizations of employers; and one ex officio member,
without a vote, who shall represent the department. The committee chair shall
be chosen by the review committee and shall alternate between employer and
employee representatives. The committee members shall serve three-year
renewable terms.

(2) Employer and
employee members of the safety and health impact grant review committee are
entitled to expenses as provided under RCW 43.03.050 and 43.03.060.

(3)(a) The safety and
health impact grant review committee with assistance from department staff
shall:

(i) Prepare requests
for proposals;

(ii) Receive, review,
and process grant applications;

(iii) Identify, by
two-thirds majority vote, grant applications that merit funding and forward
those applications to the director; and

(iv) Identify, by
two-thirds majority vote, funded grants that meet criteria for suspension or
revocation and forward those recommendations to the director.

(b) The director shall
ensure that the safety and health impact grant review committee receives
appropriate administrative support. Department staff shall provide support in
an objective, impartial manner.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
3. (1) The safety and health
impact grant review committee, in cooperation with the director, shall develop
grant application procedures and approval criteria. The director shall ensure
the proper administrative support to successfully monitor grant recipients for
compliance with grant criteria and all other procedures and requirements of the
grant program. The director in cooperation with the safety and health impact grant
review committee shall implement procedures and criteria for grant approval,
including procedures for suspension or revocation of grants to recipients
failing to comply with grant criteria established under the authority of this
section or other legal requirements.

(2) The director shall
approve only those grant applications and their recommended acceptance
conditions as forwarded by the safety and health impact grant review committee,
unless the director has a compelling and substantive reason to reject an
application, whereupon the director shall provide written explanation for the
denial to the review committee. The safety and health impact grant review
committee shall review any grant applications rejected by the director and may
advise the director to reconsider. The director shall consider the advice, if
given, and shall approve the grant application with any conditions presented by
the safety and health impact grant review committee. The director may reject
that advice only for a compelling and substantive reason. If the director
rejects that advice, the safety and health impact grant review committee may
refer the application to the WISHA advisory committee. The WISHA advisory
committee shall review the application and may advise the director to
reconsider.

(3) The director may
revoke or suspend an issued grant if advised by the safety and health impact
grant review committee that the recipient is not in compliance with grant
criteria or procedures. The director may suspend an issued grant without the
advice of the safety and health impact grant review committee only for a
compelling and substantive reason and the suspension recommendation shall be
presented to the safety and health impact grant review committee for its
consideration.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
4. The department and the
safety and health impact grant review committee will present an annual review
regarding the activities of the safety and health impact grant program to the
WISHA advisory committee and the workers' compensation advisory committee, and
make it available to the appropriate standing committees of the legislature.
Based on a recommendation of the WISHA advisory committee, the workers'
compensation advisory committee shall make a biennial recommendation to the
director concerning an appropriate budget for the program.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
5. The director and
representatives from the WISHA advisory committee shall perform a comprehensive
review of the grant program that shall include, but not be limited to,
measurable outcomes related to injury and illness reduction, hazard reduction,
and safety and health awareness and shall issue a report to the appropriate
legislative committees by December 31, 2007.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
6. The following acts or
parts of acts, as now existing or hereafter amended, are each repealed,
effective July 1, 2008:

(1) Section 1 of this
act;

(2) Section 2 of this
act;

(3) Section 3 of this
act;

(4) Section 4 of this
act; and

(5) Section 5 of this
act.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
7. Sections 1 through 6 of
this act are each added to chapter 49.17 RCW.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 8. The sum of five million
dollars, or as much thereof as may be necessary, is appropriated for the
biennium ending June 30, 2003, from the medical aid account‑-state
appropriation to the department of labor and industries to carry out the
purposes of this act. Only medical aid account funds in excess of actuarial
needs may be appropriated.

---
END ---