BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF
WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1. RCW 36.70A.040 and 2000
c 36 s 1 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) Each county that
has ((both)) a population density of ((fifty thousand or more
and, until May 16, 1995, has had its population increase by more than ten
percent in the previous ten years or, on or after May 16, 1995, has had its
population increase by more than seventeen percent in the previous ten years,
and the cities located within such county, and any other county regardless of
its population that has had its population increase by more than twenty percent
in the previous ten years)) one hundred persons or more per square mile,
and the cities located within such county, shall ((conform with all of the
requirements of)) plan under this chapter. ((However, the county
legislative authority of such a county with a population of less than fifty
thousand population may adopt a resolution removing the county, and the cities
located within the county, from the requirements of adopting comprehensive land
use plans and development regulations under this chapter if this resolution is
adopted and filed with the department by December 31, 1990, for counties
initially meeting this set of criteria, or within sixty days of the date the
office of financial management certifies that a county meets this set of
criteria under subsection (5) of this section. For the purposes of this
subsection, a county not currently planning under this chapter is not required
to include in its population count those persons confined in a correctional
facility under the jurisdiction of the department of corrections that is
located in the county.

Once a county meets either
of these sets of criteria, the requirement to conform with all of the
requirements of this chapter remains in effect, even if the county no longer
meets one of these sets of criteria.))

(2) The county
legislative authority of any county that does not meet ((either of)) the
((sets of)) criteria established under subsection (1) of this section
may adopt a resolution indicating its intention to ((have subsection (1) of
this section apply to the county)) plan under this chapter. Each
city, located in a county that chooses to plan under this subsection, shall
conform with all of the requirements of this chapter. ((Once such a
resolution has been adopted, the county and the cities located within the
county remain subject to all of the requirements of this chapter.))

(3) Any county or city
that is ((initially)) required to ((conform with all of the
requirements of)) plan under this chapter under subsection (1) of
this section shall take actions under this chapter as follows: (a) The county
legislative authority shall adopt a county-wide planning policy under RCW
36.70A.210; (b) the county and each city located within the county shall
designate critical areas, agricultural lands, forest lands, and mineral
resource lands, and adopt development regulations conserving these designated
agricultural lands, forest lands, and mineral resource lands and protecting
these designated critical areas, under RCW 36.70A.170 and 36.70A.060; (c) the
county shall designate and take other actions related to urban growth areas
under RCW 36.70A.110; (d) ((if the county has a population of fifty thousand
or more,)) the county and each city located within the county shall adopt a
comprehensive plan under this chapter and development regulations that are
consistent with and implement the comprehensive plan ((on or before July 1,
1994, and if the county has a population of less than fifty thousand, the county
and each city located within the county shall adopt a comprehensive plan under
this chapter and development regulations that are consistent with and implement
the comprehensive plan by January 1, 1995, but if the governor makes written
findings that a county with a population of less than fifty thousand or a city
located within such a county is not making reasonable progress toward adopting
a comprehensive plan and development regulations the governor may reduce this
deadline for such actions to be taken by no more than one hundred eighty days.
Any county or city subject to this subsection may obtain an additional six
months before it is required to have adopted its development regulations by
submitting a letter notifying the department of community, trade, and economic
development of its need prior to the deadline for adopting both a comprehensive
plan and development regulations)).

(4) Any county or city
that is required to ((conform with all the requirements of)) plan
under this chapter, as a result of the county legislative authority
adopting its resolution of intention under subsection (2) of this section,
shall take actions under this chapter as follows: (a) The county legislative
authority shall adopt a county-wide planning policy under RCW 36.70A.210; (b)
the county and each city that is located within the county shall adopt
development regulations conserving agricultural lands, forest lands, and
mineral resource lands it designated under RCW 36.70A.060 within one year of
the date the county legislative authority adopts its resolution of intention;
(c) the county shall designate and take other actions related to urban growth
areas under RCW 36.70A.110; and (d) the county and each city that is located
within the county shall adopt a comprehensive plan and development regulations
that are consistent with and implement the comprehensive plan not later than
four years from the date the county legislative authority adopts its resolution
of intention, but a county or city may obtain an additional six months before
it is required to have adopted its development regulations by submitting a
letter notifying the department of community, trade, and economic development
of its need prior to the deadline for adopting both a comprehensive plan and
development regulations.

(5) If the office of
financial management certifies that the population of a county that previously
had not been required to plan under subsection (1) or (2) of this section has
changed sufficiently to meet ((either of)) the ((sets of))
criteria specified under subsection (1) of this section, ((and where
applicable, the county legislative authority has not adopted a resolution
removing the county from these requirements as provided in subsection (1) of
this section,)) the county and each city within such county shall take
actions under this chapter as follows: (a) The county legislative authority
shall adopt a county-wide planning policy under RCW 36.70A.210; (b) the county
and each city located within the county shall adopt development regulations
under RCW 36.70A.060 conserving agricultural lands, forest lands, and mineral
resource lands it designated within one year of the certification by the office
of financial management; (c) the county shall designate and take other actions
related to urban growth areas under RCW 36.70A.110; and (d) the county and each
city located within the county shall adopt a comprehensive land use plan and
development regulations that are consistent with and implement the
comprehensive plan within four years of the certification by the office of
financial management, but a county or city may obtain an additional six months
before it is required to have adopted its development regulations by submitting
a letter notifying the department of community, trade, and economic development
of its need prior to the deadline for adopting both a comprehensive plan and
development regulations.

(6) A copy of each
document that is required under this section shall be submitted to the
department at the time of its adoption.

(7) Cities and counties
planning under this chapter must amend the transportation element of the
comprehensive plan to be in compliance with this chapter and chapter 47.80 RCW
no later than December 31, 2000.

(8) The county
legislative authority of any county with a population density of less than one
hundred persons per square mile which currently plans under this chapter may
remove the county and the cities located within the county from the requirement
to plan under this section under the procedures in this subsection.

(a) The county
legislative authority, by majority vote, may adopt a resolution stating its
intent to remove the county, and the cities located within the county, from the
requirement to plan under this section and submit the resolution to the cities
located within the county.

(b) If the county
has two or more cities, the county and the cities located within the county are
no longer subject to the requirement to plan under this section:

(i) If within sixty
days of submission of the resolution of intent, a majority of the cities adopt
resolutions concurring in the resolution of the county; or

(ii) If the cities
do not concur within sixty days under (b)(i) of this subsection, if a
resolution removing the county and the cities located within the county from
the requirement to plan under this section is submitted to and approved by a
majority of the registered voters in the county at the next general election.

(c) If the county
has one city, the county and the city located within the county are no longer
subject to the requirement to plan under this section:

(i) If within sixty
days of submission of the resolution of intent, the city adopts a resolution
concurring in the resolution of the county; or

(ii) If the city
does not concur within sixty days under (c)(i) of this subsection, if a
resolution removing the county and the city located within the county from the
requirement to plan under this section is submitted to and approved by a
majority of the registered voters in the county at the next general election.

(d) A county, and
the cities located within the county, that are no longer required to plan under
this section remain subject to the requirements for the designation and
protection of critical areas and the designation of natural resource lands
under RCW 36.70A.060(2), 36.70A.170, and 36.70A.172.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
2. A new section is added
to chapter 36.70A RCW to read as follows:

If a
resolution is adopted or approved under RCW 36.70A.040(8) removing the county
and the cities located within the county from the requirement to plan under
this chapter, any claim pending before a board or court that relates to the
requirement to plan under this chapter is moot and the claim shall be
dismissed.

---
END ---