BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF
WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1. RCW 48.21.045 and 1995 c
265 s 14 are each amended to read as follows:

(1)(a) An insurer
offering any health benefit plan to a small employer shall offer and actively
market to the small employer a health benefit plan ((providing benefits
identical to the schedule of covered health services that are required to be
delivered to an individual enrolled in the basic health plan)) featuring
a limited schedule of covered health services. Nothing in this subsection
shall preclude an insurer from offering, or a small employer from purchasing,
other health benefit plans that may have more ((or less)) comprehensive
benefits than ((the basic health plan, provided such plans are in accordance
with this chapter)) those included in the product offered under this
subsection. An insurer offering a health benefit plan ((that does not
include benefits in the basic health plan)) under this subsection
shall clearly disclose ((these differences)) all covered benefits
to the small employer in a brochure approved by the commissioner.

(b) A health benefit
plan offered under this subsection shall provide coverage for hospital
expenses and services rendered by a physician licensed under chapter 18.57 or
18.71 RCW but ((is not subject to)) will not include the ((requirements
of)) services identified in RCW 48.21.130, 48.21.140, ((48.21.141,))
48.21.142, 48.21.143, 48.21.144, 48.21.146, 48.21.148, 48.21.160
through 48.21.197, 48.21.200, 48.21.220, 48.21.225, 48.21.230, 48.21.235,
48.21.240, 48.21.244, 48.21.250, 48.21.300, 48.21.310, ((or)) 48.21.320
((if: (i) The health benefit plan is the mandatory offering under (a) of
this subsection that provides benefits identical to the basic health plan, to
the extent these requirements differ from the basic health plan; or (ii) the
health benefit plan is offered to employers with not more than twenty-five
employees)), 48.43.045(1), 48.43.125, or 48.43.180.

(2) Nothing in this
section shall prohibit an insurer from offering, or a purchaser from seeking, health
benefit plans with benefits in excess of the ((basic health plan
services)) health benefit plan offered under subsection (1) of this
section. All forms, policies, and contracts shall be submitted for
approval to the commissioner, and the rates of any plan offered under subsection
(1) of this section shall be reasonable in relation to the benefits
thereto.

(3) Premium rates for
health benefit plans for small employers as defined in this section shall be
subject to the following provisions:

(a) The insurer shall
develop its rates based on an adjusted community rate and may only vary the
adjusted community rate for:

(i) Geographic area;

(ii) Family size;

(iii) Age; and

(iv) Wellness
activities.

(b) The adjustment for
age in (a)(iii) of this subsection may not use age brackets smaller than
five-year increments, which shall begin with age twenty and end with age
sixty-five. Employees under the age of twenty shall be treated as those age
twenty.

(c) The insurer shall
be permitted to develop separate rates for individuals age sixty-five or older
for coverage for which medicare is the primary payer and coverage for which
medicare is not the primary payer. Both rates shall be subject to the
requirements of this subsection (3).

(d) The permitted rates
for any age group shall be no more than ((four hundred twenty-five percent
of the lowest rate for all age groups on January 1, 1996, four hundred percent
on January 1, 1997, and)) three hundred seventy-five percent of the
lowest rate for all age groups on January 1, 2000, and five hundred
percent on January 1, 2003, and thereafter.

(e) A discount for
wellness activities shall be permitted to reflect actuarially justified
differences in utilization or cost attributed to such programs not to exceed twenty
percent.

(f) The rate charged
for a health benefit plan offered under this section may not be adjusted more
frequently than annually except that the premium may be changed to reflect:

(i) Changes to the
enrollment of the small employer;

(ii) Changes to the
family composition of the employee;

(iii) Changes to the
health benefit plan requested by the small employer; or

(iv) Changes in
government requirements affecting the health benefit plan.

(g) Rating factors
shall produce premiums for identical groups that differ only by the amounts
attributable to plan design, with the exception of discounts for health
improvement programs.

(h) For the purposes of
this section, a health benefit plan that contains a restricted network
provision shall not be considered similar coverage to a health benefit plan
that does not contain such a provision, provided that the restrictions of
benefits to network providers result in substantial differences in claims
costs. This subsection does not restrict or enhance the portability of
benefits as provided in RCW 48.43.015.

(i) Adjusted community
rates established under this section shall pool the medical experience of all
small groups purchasing coverage.

(4) ((The health
benefit plans authorized by this section that are lower than the required
offering shall not supplant or supersede any existing policy for the benefit of
employees in this state.)) Nothing in this section shall restrict the
right of employees to collectively bargain for insurance providing benefits in excess
of those provided herein.

(5)(a) Except as
provided in this subsection, requirements used by an insurer in determining
whether to provide coverage to a small employer shall be applied uniformly
among all small employers applying for coverage or receiving coverage from the
carrier.

(b) An insurer shall
not require a minimum participation level greater than:

(i) One hundred percent
of eligible employees working for groups with three or less employees; and

(ii) Seventy-five
percent of eligible employees working for groups with more than three
employees.

(c) In applying minimum
participation requirements with respect to a small employer, a small employer
shall not consider employees or dependents who have similar existing coverage
in determining whether the applicable percentage of participation is met.

(d) An insurer may not
increase any requirement for minimum employee participation or modify any
requirement for minimum employer contribution applicable to a small employer at
any time after the small employer has been accepted for coverage.

(6) An insurer must
offer coverage to all eligible employees of a small employer and their
dependents. An insurer may not offer coverage to only certain individuals or
dependents in a small employer group or to only part of the group. An insurer
may not modify a health plan with respect to a small employer or any eligible
employee or dependent, through riders, endorsements or otherwise, to restrict
or exclude coverage or benefits for specific diseases, medical conditions, or
services otherwise covered by the plan.

(7) As used in this
section, "health benefit plan," "small employer," "basic
health plan," "adjusted community rate," and "wellness
activities" mean the same as defined in RCW 48.43.005.

Sec. 2. RCW 48.44.023 and 1995 c
265 s 16 are each amended to read as follows:

(1)(a) A health care
services contractor offering any health benefit plan to a small employer, as
that term is defined in RCW 48.43.005, shall offer and actively market to
the small employer a health benefit plan ((providing benefits identical to
the schedule of covered health services that are required to be delivered to an
individual enrolled in the basic health plan)) featuring a limited
schedule of covered health services. Nothing in this subsection shall
preclude a contractor from offering, or a small employer from purchasing, other
health benefit plans that may have more ((or less)) comprehensive
benefits than ((the basic health plan, provided such plans are in accordance
with this chapter)) those included in the product offered under this
subsection. A contractor offering a health benefit plan ((that does not
include benefits in the basic health plan)) under this subsection
shall clearly disclose ((these differences)) all covered benefits
to the small employer in a brochure approved by the commissioner.

(b) A health benefit
plan offered under this subsection shall provide coverage for hospital
expenses and services rendered by a physician licensed under chapter 18.57 or
18.71 RCW but ((is not subject to the requirements of)) will not
include the services identified in RCW 48.44.225, 48.44.240, 48.44.245, ((48.44.290,
48.44.300,)) 48.44.310, 48.44.315, 48.44.320, 48.44.325, 48.44.330,
48.44.335, 48.44.340, 48.44.344, 48.44.360, 48.44.400, 48.44.440, 48.44.450, ((and))
48.44.460 ((if: (i) The health benefit plan is the mandatory offering under
(a) of this subsection that provides benefits identical to the basic health
plan, to the extent these requirements differ from the basic health plan; or
(ii) the health benefit plan is offered to employers with not more than
twenty-five employees)), 48.44.500, 48.43.045(1), 48.43.125, and
48.43.180.

(2) Nothing in this
section shall prohibit a health care service contractor from offering, or a
purchaser from seeking, health benefits plans with benefits in excess of
the ((basic health plan services)) health benefit plan offered under
subsection (1) of this section. All forms, policies, and contracts shall
be submitted for approval to the commissioner, and the rates of any plan
offered under subsection (1) of this section shall be reasonable in relation
to the benefits thereto.

(3) Premium rates for
health benefit plans for small employers as defined in this section shall be
subject to the following provisions:

(a) The contractor
shall develop its rates based on an adjusted community rate and may only vary
the adjusted community rate for:

(i) Geographic area;

(ii) Family size;

(iii) Age; and

(iv) Wellness
activities.

(b) The adjustment for
age in (a)(iii) of this subsection may not use age brackets smaller than
five-year increments, which shall begin with age twenty and end with age
sixty-five. Employees under the age of twenty shall be treated as those age
twenty.

(c) The contractor
shall be permitted to develop separate rates for individuals age sixty-five or
older for coverage for which medicare is the primary payer and coverage for
which medicare is not the primary payer. Both rates shall be subject to the
requirements of this subsection (3).

(d) The permitted rates
for any age group shall be no more than ((four hundred twenty-five percent
of the lowest rate for all age groups on January 1, 1996, four hundred percent
on January 1, 1997, and)) three hundred seventy-five percent of the
lowest rate for all age groups on January 1, 2000, and five hundred
percent on January 1, 2003, and thereafter.

(e) A discount for
wellness activities shall be permitted to reflect actuarially justified
differences in utilization or cost attributed to such programs not to exceed
twenty percent.

(f) The rate charged
for a health benefit plan offered under this section may not be adjusted more
frequently than annually except that the premium may be changed to reflect:

(i) Changes to the
enrollment of the small employer;

(ii) Changes to the
family composition of the employee;

(iii) Changes to the
health benefit plan requested by the small employer; or

(iv) Changes in
government requirements affecting the health benefit plan.

(g) Rating factors
shall produce premiums for identical groups that differ only by the amounts
attributable to plan design, with the exception of discounts for health
improvement programs.

(h) For the purposes of
this section, a health benefit plan that contains a restricted network
provision shall not be considered similar coverage to a health benefit plan
that does not contain such a provision, provided that the restrictions of
benefits to network providers result in substantial differences in claims
costs. This subsection does not restrict or enhance the portability of
benefits as provided in RCW 48.43.015.

(i) Adjusted community
rates established under this section shall pool the medical experience of all
groups purchasing coverage.

(4) ((The health
benefit plans authorized by this section that are lower than the required
offering shall not supplant or supersede any existing policy for the benefit of
employees in this state.)) Nothing in this section shall restrict the
right of employees to collectively bargain for insurance providing benefits in
excess of those provided herein.

(5)(a) Except as
provided in this subsection, requirements used by a contractor in determining
whether to provide coverage to a small employer shall be applied uniformly
among all small employers applying for coverage or receiving coverage from the
carrier.

(b) A contractor shall
not require a minimum participation level greater than:

(i) One hundred percent
of eligible employees working for groups with three or less employees; and

(ii) Seventy-five
percent of eligible employees working for groups with more than three
employees.

(c) In applying minimum
participation requirements with respect to a small employer, a small employer
shall not consider employees or dependents who have similar existing coverage
in determining whether the applicable percentage of participation is met.

(d) A contractor may
not increase any requirement for minimum employee participation or modify any
requirement for minimum employer contribution applicable to a small employer at
any time after the small employer has been accepted for coverage.

(6) A contractor must
offer coverage to all eligible employees of a small employer and their
dependents. A contractor may not offer coverage to only certain individuals or
dependents in a small employer group or to only part of the group. A
contractor may not modify a health plan with respect to a small employer or any
eligible employee or dependent, through riders, endorsements or otherwise, to restrict
or exclude coverage or benefits for specific diseases, medical conditions, or
services otherwise covered by the plan.

Sec. 3. RCW 48.46.066 and 1995 c
265 s 18 are each amended to read as follows:

(1)(a) A health maintenance
organization offering any health benefit plan to a small employer, as that
term is defined in RCW 48.43.005, shall offer and actively market to the
small employer a health benefit plan ((providing benefits identical to the
schedule of covered health services that are required to be delivered to an
individual enrolled in the basic health plan)) featuring a limited
schedule of covered health services. Nothing in this subsection shall
preclude a health maintenance organization from offering, or a small employer
from purchasing, other health benefit plans that may have more ((or less))
comprehensive benefits than ((the basic health plan, provided such plans are
in accordance with this chapter)) those included in the product offered
under this subsection. A health maintenance organization offering a health
benefit plan ((that does not include benefits in the basic health plan))
under this subsection shall clearly disclose ((these differences))
all covered benefits to the small employer in a brochure approved by the
commissioner.

(b) A health benefit
plan offered under this subsection shall provide coverage for hospital
expenses and services rendered by a physician licensed under chapter 18.57 or
18.71 RCW but ((is not subject to the requirements of)) will not
include the services identified in RCW 48.46.272, 48.46.275,
48.46.280, 48.46.285, 48.46.290, 48.46.350, 48.46.355, 48.46.375, 48.46.440,
48.46.480, 48.46.510, 48.46.520, ((and)) 48.46.530 ((if: (i) The
health benefit plan is the mandatory offering under (a) of this subsection that
provides benefits identical to the basic health plan, to the extent these
requirements differ from the basic health plan; or (ii) the health benefit plan
is offered to employers with not more than twenty-five employees)), and
48.46.570.

(2) Nothing in this
section shall prohibit a health maintenance organization from offering, or a
purchaser from seeking, health benefit plans with benefits in excess of
the ((basic health plan services)) health benefit plan offered under
subsection (1) of this section. All forms, policies, and contracts shall
be submitted for approval to the commissioner, and the rates of any plan
offered under this section shall be reasonable in relation to the benefits thereto.

(3) Premium rates for
health benefit plans for small employers as defined in this section shall be
subject to the following provisions:

(a) The health
maintenance organization shall develop its rates based on an adjusted community
rate and may only vary the adjusted community rate for:

(i) Geographic area;

(ii) Family size;

(iii) Age; and

(iv) Wellness
activities.

(b) The adjustment for
age in (a)(iii) of this subsection may not use age brackets smaller than
five-year increments, which shall begin with age twenty and end with age
sixty-five. Employees under the age of twenty shall be treated as those age
twenty.

(c) The health
maintenance organization shall be permitted to develop separate rates for
individuals age sixty-five or older for coverage for which medicare is the
primary payer and coverage for which medicare is not the primary payer. Both
rates shall be subject to the requirements of this subsection (3).

(d) The permitted rates
for any age group shall be no more than ((four hundred twenty-five percent
of the lowest rate for all age groups on January 1, 1996, four hundred percent
on January 1, 1997, and)) three hundred seventy-five percent of the
lowest rate for all age groups on January 1, 2000, and five hundred
percent on January 1, 2003, and thereafter.

(e) A discount for
wellness activities shall be permitted to reflect actuarially justified
differences in utilization or cost attributed to such programs not to exceed
twenty percent.

(f) The rate charged
for a health benefit plan offered under this section may not be adjusted more
frequently than annually except that the premium may be changed to reflect:

(i) Changes to the
enrollment of the small employer;

(ii) Changes to the
family composition of the employee;

(iii) Changes to the
health benefit plan requested by the small employer; or

(iv) Changes in
government requirements affecting the health benefit plan.

(g) Rating factors
shall produce premiums for identical groups that differ only by the amounts
attributable to plan design, with the exception of discounts for health
improvement programs.

(h) For the purposes of
this section, a health benefit plan that contains a restricted network
provision shall not be considered similar coverage to a health benefit plan
that does not contain such a provision, provided that the restrictions of
benefits to network providers result in substantial differences in claims
costs. This subsection does not restrict or enhance the portability of
benefits as provided in RCW 48.43.015.

(i) Adjusted community
rates established under this section shall pool the medical experience of all
groups purchasing coverage.

(4) ((The health
benefit plans authorized by this section that are lower than the required
offering shall not supplant or supersede any existing policy for the benefit of
employees in this state.)) Nothing in this section shall restrict the
right of employees to collectively bargain for insurance providing benefits in
excess of those provided herein.

(5)(a) Except as provided
in this subsection, requirements used by a health maintenance organization in
determining whether to provide coverage to a small employer shall be applied
uniformly among all small employers applying for coverage or receiving coverage
from the carrier.

(b) A health
maintenance organization shall not require a minimum participation level
greater than:

(i) One hundred percent
of eligible employees working for groups with three or less employees; and

(ii) Seventy-five
percent of eligible employees working for groups with more than three
employees.

(c) In applying minimum
participation requirements with respect to a small employer, a small employer
shall not consider employees or dependents who have similar existing coverage
in determining whether the applicable percentage of participation is met.

(d) A health
maintenance organization may not increase any requirement for minimum employee
participation or modify any requirement for minimum employer contribution
applicable to a small employer at any time after the small employer has been
accepted for coverage.

(6) A health
maintenance organization must offer coverage to all eligible employees of a
small employer and their dependents. A health maintenance organization may not
offer coverage to only certain individuals or dependents in a small employer
group or to only part of the group. A health maintenance organization may not
modify a health plan with respect to a small employer or any eligible employee
or dependent, through riders, endorsements or otherwise, to restrict or exclude
coverage or benefits for specific diseases, medical conditions, or services
otherwise covered by the plan.

Sec. 4. RCW 48.43.035 and 2000 c
79 s 24 are each amended to read as follows:

For group health
benefit plans, the following shall apply:

(1) All health carriers
shall accept for enrollment any state resident within the group to whom the
plan is offered and within the carrier's service area and provide or assure the
provision of all covered services regardless of age, sex, family structure,
ethnicity, race, health condition, geographic location, employment status,
socioeconomic status, other condition or situation, or the provisions of RCW
49.60.174(2). The insurance commissioner may grant a temporary exemption from
this subsection, if, upon application by a health carrier the commissioner
finds that the clinical, financial, or administrative capacity to serve
existing enrollees will be impaired if a health carrier is required to continue
enrollment of additional eligible individuals.

(2) Except as provided
in subsection (5) of this section, all health plans shall contain or
incorporate by endorsement a guarantee of the continuity of coverage of the
plan. For the purposes of this section, a plan is "renewed" when it
is continued beyond the earliest date upon which, at the carrier's sole option,
the plan could have been terminated for other than nonpayment of premium. The
carrier may consider the group's anniversary date as the renewal date for
purposes of complying with the provisions of this section.

(3) The guarantee of
continuity of coverage required in health plans shall not prevent a carrier
from canceling or nonrenewing a health plan for:

(a) Nonpayment of
premium;

(b) Violation of published
policies of the carrier approved by the insurance commissioner;

(c) Covered persons
entitled to become eligible for medicare benefits by reason of age who fail to
apply for a medicare supplement plan or medicare cost, risk, or other plan
offered by the carrier pursuant to federal laws and regulations;

(d) Covered persons who
fail to pay any deductible or copayment amount owed to the carrier and not the
provider of health care services;

(e) Covered persons
committing fraudulent acts as to the carrier;

(f) Covered persons who
materially breach the health plan; or

(g) Change or
implementation of federal or state laws that no longer permit the continued
offering of such coverage.

(4) ((The provisions
of)) This section ((do)) does not apply in the
following cases:

(a) A carrier has zero
enrollment on a product; or

(b) For group health
plans sold to groups other than small employer groups, a carrier replaces a
product and the replacement product is provided to all covered persons within
that class or line of business, includes all of the services covered under the
replaced product, and does not significantly limit access to the kind of
services covered under the replaced product. The health plan may also allow
unrestricted conversion to a fully comparable product; or

(c) For group health
plans offered to small employer groups, no sooner than October 1, 2002, a
carrier discontinues offering a particular type of health benefit plan if: (i)
The carrier provides notice to each group provided coverage of this type of the
discontinuation at least ninety days prior to the date of the discontinuation;
(ii) the carrier offers to each group provided coverage of this type the option
to enroll in any other small employer group health benefit plan currently being
offered by the carrier; and (iii) in exercising the option to discontinue
coverage of this type and in offering the option of coverage under (c)(ii) of
this subsection, the carrier acts uniformly without regard to any health
status-related factor of individuals enrolled through the small employer group,
individuals who may become eligible for such coverage, or the collective health
status of groups enrolled in coverage of this type; or

(d) A carrier
discontinues offering all small employer group health coverage in the state and
discontinues coverage under all existing small employer group health benefit
plans if: (i) The carrier provides notice to the commissioner of its intent to
discontinue offering all small employer group health coverage in the state and
its intent to discontinue coverage under all existing health benefit plans at
least one hundred eighty days prior to the date of the discontinuation of
coverage under all existing health benefit plans; and (ii) the carrier provides
notice to each covered small employer group of the intent to discontinue his or
her existing health benefit plan at least one hundred eighty days prior to the
date of the discontinuation and includes information in the notice that can
help the small employer group identify alternative sources of coverage. In the
case of discontinuation under this subsection, the carrier may not issue any
small employer group health coverage in this state for a five-year period
beginning on the date of the discontinuation of the last health plan not so
renewed. Nothing in this subsection (3) may be construed to require a carrier
to provide notice to the commissioner of its intent to discontinue offering a
health benefit plan to new applicants where the carrier does not discontinue
coverage of existing enrollees under that health benefit plan; or

(e) A carrier is
withdrawing from a service area or from a segment of its service area because
the carrier has demonstrated to the insurance commissioner that the carrier's
clinical, financial, or administrative capacity to serve enrollees would be
exceeded.

(5) The provisions of
this section do not apply to health plans deemed by the insurance commissioner
to be unique or limited or have a short-term purpose, after a written request
for such classification by the carrier and subsequent written approval by the
insurance commissioner.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
5. A new section is added
to chapter 48.43 RCW to read as follows:

Beginning January 1,
2003, any carrier offering health benefit plans to small employers in addition
to the benefit plan authorized under RCW 48.21.045, 48.44.023, and 48.46.066
must offer and actively market to small employers at least three other plans of
the carrier's choosing. Nothing in this section limits the ability of a
carrier to offer small employer group health benefit plans in addition to those
that must be offered under this section.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
6. A new section is added
to chapter 70.47 RCW to read as follows:

(1) In coordination
with the department of social and health services medical assistance
administration and interested entities, the administrator will identify and
design pilot projects to improve health care coverage access, including review
of proposals by entities that have received funding through the federal health
resources and services administration community access program. The
administrator may approve pilot projects that are found to be feasible. Pilot
projects may include applying basic health plan or medical assistance subsidy
payments toward employer-sponsored health insurance or other health insurance
premium shares, rather than as direct payments to managed health care systems
participating in the basic health plan or medical assistance program.

(2) The schedule of
benefits for persons enrolled through an approved pilot project may differ from
the benefits offered through the basic health plan, but shall be reasonably
comparable in value to those benefits.

(3) By November 1,
2002, the administrator and the secretary of the department of social and
health services shall jointly report to the health care committees of the
senate and the house of representatives on their progress in developing the
pilot projects authorized in this act, the anticipated implementation date of
any pilot project under development, and the resources needed to implement the
pilot project.

Sec. 7. RCW 70.47.020 and 2000 c
79 s 43 are each amended to read as follows:

As used in this
chapter:

(1) "Washington
basic health plan" or "plan" means the system of enrollment and
payment for basic health care services, administered by the plan administrator
through participating managed health care systems, created by this chapter.

(2)
"Administrator" means the Washington basic health plan administrator,
who also holds the position of administrator of the Washington state health
care authority.

(3) "Managed
health care system" means: (a) Any health care organization, including
health care providers, insurers, health care service contractors, health
maintenance organizations, or any combination thereof, that provides directly
or by contract basic health care services, as defined by the administrator and
rendered by duly licensed providers, to a defined patient population enrolled
in the plan and in the managed health care system; or (b) a self-funded or
self-insured method of providing insurance coverage to subsidized enrollees
provided under RCW 41.05.140 and subject to the limitations under RCW
70.47.100(7).

(4) "Subsidized
enrollee" means an individual, or an individual plus the individual's
spouse or dependent children: (a) Who is not eligible for medicare; (b) who is
not confined or residing in a government-operated institution, unless he or she
meets eligibility criteria adopted by the administrator; (c) who resides in an
area of the state served by a managed health care system participating in the
plan; (d) whose gross family income at the time of enrollment does not exceed
two hundred percent of the federal poverty level as adjusted for family size
and determined annually by the federal department of health and human services;
and (e) who chooses to obtain basic health care coverage from a particular
managed health care system in return for periodic payments to the plan. To the
extent that state funds are specifically appropriated for this purpose, with a
corresponding federal match, "subsidized enrollee" also means an
individual, or an individual's spouse or dependent children, who meets the
requirements in (a) through (c) and (e) of this subsection and whose gross
family income at the time of enrollment is more than two hundred percent, but
less than two hundred fifty-one percent, of the federal poverty level as adjusted
for family size and determined annually by the federal department of health and
human services. Upon approval of a pilot project under section 6 of this
act, "subsidized enrollee" also means an individual, or an
individual's spouse or dependent children, who meets the requirements of (a),
(b), and (d) of this subsection, who resides within the state of Washington,
and who qualifies for a premium subsidy under a pilot project approved under
section 6 of this act.

(5) "Nonsubsidized
enrollee" means an individual, or an individual plus the individual's
spouse or dependent children: (a) Who is not eligible for medicare; (b) who is
not confined or residing in a government-operated institution, unless he or she
meets eligibility criteria adopted by the administrator; (c) who resides in an
area of the state served by a managed health care system participating in the
plan; (d) who chooses to obtain basic health care coverage from a particular
managed health care system; and (e) who pays or on whose behalf is paid the
full costs for participation in the plan, without any subsidy from the plan.

(6) "Subsidy"
means the difference between the amount of periodic payment the administrator
makes to a managed health care system or through payments developed as part
of a pilot project approved under section 6 of this act on behalf of a
subsidized enrollee plus the administrative cost to the plan of providing the
plan to that subsidized enrollee, and the amount determined to be the
subsidized enrollee's responsibility under RCW 70.47.060(2).

(7) "Premium"
means a periodic payment, based upon gross family income which an individual,
their employer or another financial sponsor makes to the plan as consideration
for enrollment in the plan as a subsidized enrollee or a nonsubsidized
enrollee.

(8) "Rate"
means the amount, negotiated by the administrator with and paid to a
participating managed health care system, that is based upon the enrollment of
subsidized and nonsubsidized enrollees in the plan and in that system.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 8. Section 4 of this act
takes effect January 1, 2003.

---
END ---