BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF
WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec.
1. (1) The legislature finds
that prescription drugs are an effective and important part of efforts to
maintain and improve the health of Washington state residents. Yet
prescription drug expenditures in both the public and private sectors are
growing at rates far in excess of consumer or medical inflation, placing a
strain on the ability of public and private health care purchasers to continue
to offer comprehensive health benefits coverage. In addition, inappropriate
use of prescription drugs can have serious health consequences for Washington
state residents.

(2) It is the intent of
the legislature to develop a comprehensive prescription drug education and
utilization system in Washington state that will ensure best prescribing
practices and pharmaceutical use, reduce administrative burdens on providers,
increase consumer understanding of and compliance with appropriate use of
prescription drugs, help to control increases in consumer and state health care
spending, and improve prescription drug purchasing through a sound
evidence-based process that evaluates the therapeutic value and
cost-effectiveness of prescription drugs.

Sec. 2. RCW 74.09.010 and 1990 c
296 s 6 are each amended to read as follows:

((As used in this
chapter:)) The definitions in this section apply throughout this chapter
unless the context clearly requires otherwise.

(1) "Children's
health program" means the health care services program provided to
children under eighteen years of age and in households with incomes at or below
the federal poverty level as annually defined by the federal department of
health and human services as adjusted for family size, and who are not
otherwise eligible for medical assistance or the limited casualty program for
the medically needy.

(2)
"Committee" means the ((children's health services)) pharmacy
and therapeutics committee ((created in section 3 of this act)).

(3) "County"
means the board of county commissioners, county council, county executive, or
tribal jurisdiction, or its designee. A combination of two or more county
authorities or tribal jurisdictions may enter into joint agreements to fulfill
the requirements of RCW 74.09.415 through 74.09.435.

(4)
"Department" means the department of social and health services.

(5) "Department of
health" means the Washington state department of health created pursuant
to RCW 43.70.020.

(6) "Internal
management" means the administration of medical assistance, medical care
services, the children's health program, and the limited casualty program.

(7) "Limited
casualty program" means the medical care program provided to medically
needy persons as defined under Title XIX of the federal social security act,
and to medically indigent persons who are without income or resources
sufficient to secure necessary medical services.

(8) "Medical
assistance" means the federal aid medical care program provided to
categorically needy persons as defined under Title XIX of the federal social
security act.

(9) "Medical care
services" means the limited scope of care financed by state funds and
provided to general assistance recipients, and recipients of alcohol and drug
addiction services provided under chapter 74.50 RCW.

(10) "Nursing
home" means nursing home as defined in RCW 18.51.010.

(11) "Poverty"
means the federal poverty level determined annually by the United States
department of health and human services, or successor agency.

(12) "Preferred
drug" means the department's drug of choice within a selected therapeutic
class, as determined by the process established in section 4 of this act.

(13) "Prior
authorization" means a process requiring the prescriber or the dispenser
to verify with the state medicaid agency or its contractor that the proposed
medical use of a particular medicine for a patient meets predetermined criteria
for payment by the program.

(14)
"Secretary" means the secretary of social and health services.

(15)
"Therapeutic class" means a group of drugs used for the diagnosis,
treatment, remediation, or cure of a specific disorder or disease.

Sec. 3. RCW 41.05.011 and 2001 c
165 s 2 are each amended to read as follows:

((Unless the context
clearly requires otherwise,)) The definitions in this section ((shall))
apply throughout this chapter unless the context clearly requires otherwise.

(1)
"Administrator" means the administrator of the authority.

(2) "State
purchased health care" or "health care" means medical and health
care, pharmaceuticals, and medical equipment purchased with state and federal funds
by the department of social and health services, the department of health, the
basic health plan, the state health care authority, the department of labor and
industries, the department of corrections, the department of veterans affairs,
and local school districts.

(3)
"Authority" means the Washington state health care authority.

(4) "Insuring
entity" means an insurer as defined in chapter 48.01 RCW, a health care
service contractor as defined in chapter 48.44 RCW, or a health maintenance
organization as defined in chapter 48.46 RCW.

(5) "Flexible
benefit plan" means a benefit plan that allows employees to choose the
level of health care coverage provided and the amount of employee contributions
from among a range of choices offered by the authority.

(6)
"Employee" includes all full-time and career seasonal employees of
the state, whether or not covered by civil service; elected and appointed
officials of the executive branch of government, including full-time members of
boards, commissions, or committees; and includes any or all part-time and
temporary employees under the terms and conditions established under this
chapter by the authority; justices of the supreme court and judges of the court
of appeals and the superior courts; and members of the state legislature or of
the legislative authority of any county, city, or town who are elected to
office after February 20, 1970. "Employee" also includes: (a)
Employees of a county, municipality, or other political subdivision of the
state if the legislative authority of the county, municipality, or other
political subdivision of the state seeks and receives the approval of the
authority to provide any of its insurance programs by contract with the
authority, as provided in RCW 41.04.205; (b) employees of employee
organizations representing state civil service employees, at the option of each
such employee organization, and, effective October 1, 1995, employees of
employee organizations currently pooled with employees of school districts for
the purpose of purchasing insurance benefits, at the option of each such
employee organization; and (c) employees of a school district if the authority
agrees to provide any of the school districts' insurance programs by contract
with the authority as provided in RCW 28A.400.350.

(7) "Board"
means the public employees' benefits board established under RCW 41.05.055.

(8) "Retired or
disabled school employee" means:

(a) Persons who
separated from employment with a school district or educational service
district and are receiving a retirement allowance under chapter 41.32 or 41.40
RCW as of September 30, 1993;

(b) Persons who
separate from employment with a school district or educational service district
on or after October 1, 1993, and immediately upon separation receive a
retirement allowance under chapter 41.32, 41.35, or 41.40 RCW;

(c) Persons who
separate from employment with a school district or educational service district
due to a total and permanent disability, and are eligible to receive a deferred
retirement allowance under chapter 41.32, 41.35, or 41.40 RCW.

(9) "Benefits
contribution plan" means a premium only contribution plan, a medical
flexible spending arrangement, or a cafeteria plan whereby state and public
employees may agree to a contribution to benefit costs which will allow the
employee to participate in benefits offered pursuant to 26 U.S.C. Sec. 125 or
other sections of the internal revenue code.

(10) "Salary"
means a state employee's monthly salary or wages.

(11)
"Participant" means an individual who fulfills the eligibility and
enrollment requirements under the benefits contribution plan.

(12) "Plan
year" means the time period established by the authority.

(13) "Separated
employees" means persons who separate from employment with an employer as
defined in:

(a) RCW 41.32.010(11)
on or after July 1, 1996; or

(b) RCW 41.35.010 on or
after September 1, 2000; or

(c) RCW 41.40.010 on or
after March 1, 2002;

and who are at least age
fifty-five and have at least ten years of service under the teachers'
retirement system plan 3 as defined in RCW 41.32.010(40), the Washington school
employees' retirement system plan 3 as defined in RCW 41.35.010, or the public
employees' retirement system plan 3 as defined in RCW 41.40.010.

(14) "Emergency
service personnel killed in the line of duty" means law enforcement
officers and fire fighters as defined in RCW 41.26.030, and reserve officers
and fire fighters as defined in RCW 41.24.010 who die as a result of injuries
sustained in the course of employment as determined consistent with Title 51
RCW by the department of labor and industries.

(15) "Preferred
drug" means the authority's drug of choice within a selected therapeutic
class, as determined by the process established in section 4 of this act.

(16) "Prior
authorization" means a process requiring the prescriber or the dispenser
to verify with the authority or its contractor that the proposed medical use of
a particular medicine for a patient meets predetermined criteria for payment by
the program.

(17)
"Therapeutic class" means a group of drugs used for the diagnosis,
treatment, remediation, or cure of a specific disorder or disease.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
4. A new section is added
to chapter 41.05 RCW to read as follows:

The administrator, in
concert with other state agencies involved in state purchased health care, must
begin implementation of a preferred drug program by January 1, 2003. The
preferred drug program is initially limited to fee-for-service prescription
drug purchasing through medical assistance programs under chapter 74.09 RCW,
the uniform medical plan under this chapter, and other state purchased health
care programs. The administrator must include bulk purchased prescription
drugs in the preferred drug program according to a timetable of the
administrator's choosing. The preferred drug program shall not be applied to
health care purchased through managed care contracts with carriers. To
expedite development of the preferred drug list, the administrator, the
independent entity, and the pharmacy and therapeutics committee must make
maximum use of sound evidence-based prescription drug reviews that have been completed,
giving consideration to the needs and characteristics of populations served by
state purchased health care programs. In implementing the preferred drug
program, the administrator may adopt rules, and must:

(1) Identify for
initial consideration those classes of drugs for which agencies have
substantial annual aggregate fee-for-service expenditures;

(2) Exempt the
following drug classes from inclusion on any preferred drug list:

(a) Antipsychotics;

(b) Chemotherapy;

(c) Antiretroviral
drugs;

(d) Immunosuppressants;
and

(e) Hypoglycemia rescue
agents;

(3) Contract with one
or more qualified, independent entities to determine which drugs within each of
the identified therapeutic classes are essentially equal in terms of safety,
efficacy, and outcomes. Upon request of the pharmacy and therapeutics
committee or the authority, manufacturers must submit dossiers containing
clinical and economic data utilizing the academy of managed care pharmacy
format for preferred drug list submissions. The pharmacy and therapeutics
committee or the administrator shall request the dossier from a manufacturer
within thirty days of food and drug administration approval of any new drug.
The pharmacy and therapeutics committee or the authority must provide the dossier
to the contracted entity, who will base its determinations on the strength of
scientific evidence and standards of practice that include, but are not limited
to:

(a) Assessing
peer-reviewed medical literature, including randomized clinical trials (especially
drug comparison studies), pharmacoeconomic studies, and outcomes research data;

(b) Employing published
practice guidelines developed by an acceptable evidence-based process;

(c) Comparing the
efficacy as well as the type and frequency of side effects and potential drug
interactions among alternative drug products in the class under review;

(d) Assessing the
likely impact of a drug product on patient compliance when compared to
alternative drug products in the class under review; and

(e) Thoroughly
evaluating the benefits, risks, and potential outcomes for patients, including
adverse drug events;

(4) Submit the
determinations made under subsection (3) of this section to the pharmacy and
therapeutics committee established in section 13 of this act, which must
incorporate them into recommendations to the administrator as provided in
section 13 of this act;

(5) Develop a preferred
drug list based on the recommendations of the pharmacy and therapeutics
committee. For each therapeutic class considered, the list must identify the
drugs determined to be essentially equal and, from among those, which ones are
the preferred drugs. The pharmacy and therapeutics committee or the
administrator will revise the preferred drug list annually or as needed, to be
determined by new drug approvals, recalls, or new scientific evidence that may
change a given drug's status or use, or as necessary to meet the objectives of
this act. Each state agency that purchases or provides health care services
must adopt the preferred drug list consistent with the scope of benefits
offered through programs administered by that agency;

(6) Directly or through
interagency agreement, distribute the initial preferred drug list, and any
subsequent revisions, to every provider with prescriptive authority with whom
an agency has core provider agreement, including with it a description of how
the list was developed, how it will be used, and requesting his or her
endorsement;

(7) Ensure that a
prescriber who does not endorse the list must do so in writing to the
administrator and is subject to prior authorization as provided in sections 5
through 10 of this act;

(8) Require any
pharmacist filling a prescription for a client of state purchased health care
or entities and individuals voluntarily participating under section 18 of this
act from a prescriber who has endorsed the preferred drug list to substitute
the preferred drug for any nonpreferred drug in a given therapeutic category,
unless the prescriber has indicated on the prescription that the nonpreferred
drug must be dispensed as written, in which case the pharmacist must dispense
the nonpreferred drug as written. When a substitution is made, or the
preferred drug within a therapeutic class changes, the prescriber will be
notified in writing by the dispensing pharmacist of the specific drug and dose
dispensed;

(9) The administrator
must either provide each pharmacy with a listing of the prescribers who have
endorsed the preferred drug list or include that information in the electronic
claim adjudication system of each state drug purchasing program so that the
pharmacist may easily determine when substitution of a preferred drug has been
authorized.

Upon incorporation of a
therapeutic class into the preferred drug list, existing prior authorization
procedures applicable to that therapeutic class shall cease, and the prior
authorization provisions of sections 5 through 10 of this act shall apply.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
5. A new section is added
to chapter 41.05 RCW to read as follows:

(1) The administrator
may subject any drug in a class included in the preferred drug list established
in section 4 of this act to prior authorization in only limited circumstances,
such as when the drug is high cost, has a narrow therapeutic indication,
presents a risk of inappropriate utilization, or poses safety concerns. A new
drug that has not yet been reviewed under section 4 of this act shall be made
available by the department but may be subject to prior authorization where
clinically indicated to avoid health risks to patients. When a new drug in a
class that is included in the preferred drug list has been reviewed, and has
been found to be therapeutically equivalent to the drugs in that class, it
shall be added to that class and shall not be subject to prior authorization.
A prescriber who does not endorse the preferred drug list is subject to a
broader scope of prior authorization as determined by the administrator.

(2) The administrator
may subject drugs identified in section 4(2) of this act to prior authorization
where clinically indicated.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
6. A new section is added
to chapter 74.09 RCW to read as follows:

(1) The department may
subject any drug in a class included in section 4 of this act to prior
authorization in only limited circumstances, such as when the drug is high
cost, has a narrow therapeutic indication, presents a risk of inappropriate
utilization, or poses safety concerns. A new drug that has not yet been
reviewed under section 4 of this act shall be made available by the department
but may be subject to prior authorization where clinically indicated to avoid
health risks to patients. When a new drug in a class that is included in the
preferred drug list has been reviewed, and has been found to be therapeutically
equivalent to the drugs in that class, it shall be added to that class and
shall not be subject to prior authorization. A prescriber who does not endorse
the preferred drug list is subject to a broader scope of prior authorization as
determined by the secretary.

(2) The department may
subject drugs identified in section 4(2) of this act to prior authorization
where clinically indicated.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
7. A new section is added
to chapter 43.70 RCW to read as follows:

(1) The department may
subject any drug in a class included in section 4 of this act to prior
authorization in only limited circumstances, such as when the drug is high
cost, has a narrow therapeutic indication, presents a risk of inappropriate
utilization, or poses safety concerns. A new drug that has not yet been
reviewed under section 4 of this act shall be made available by the department
but may be subject to prior authorization where clinically indicated to avoid
health risks to patients. When a new drug in a class that is included in the
preferred drug list has been reviewed, and has been found to be therapeutically
equivalent to the drugs in that class, it shall be added to that class and
shall not be subject to prior authorization. A prescriber who does not endorse
the preferred drug list is subject to a broader scope of prior authorization as
determined by the secretary.

(2) The department may
subject drugs identified in section 4(2) of this act to prior authorization
where clinically indicated.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
8. A new section is added
to chapter 72.09 RCW to read as follows:

(1) The department may
subject any drug in a class included in section 4 of this act to prior
authorization in only limited circumstances, such as when the drug is high
cost, has a narrow therapeutic indication, presents a risk of inappropriate
utilization, or poses safety concerns. A new drug that has not yet been
reviewed under section 4 of this act shall be made available by the department
but may be subject to prior authorization where clinically indicated to avoid
health risks to patients. When a new drug in a class that is included in the
preferred drug list has been reviewed, and has been found to be therapeutically
equivalent to the drugs in that class, it shall be added to that class and
shall not be subject to prior authorization. A prescriber who does not endorse
the preferred drug list is subject to a broader scope of prior authorization as
determined by the secretary.

(2) The department may
subject drugs identified in section 4(2) of this act to prior authorization
where clinically indicated.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
9. A new section is added
to chapter 43.60A RCW to read as follows:

(1) The department may
subject any drug in a class included in section 4 of this act to prior
authorization in only limited circumstances, such as when the drug is high
cost, has a narrow therapeutic indication, presents a risk of inappropriate
utilization, or poses safety concerns. A new drug that has not yet been
reviewed under section 4 of this act shall be made available by the department
but may be subject to prior authorization where clinically indicated to avoid
health risks to patients. When a new drug in a class that is included in the
preferred drug list has been reviewed, and has been found to be therapeutically
equivalent to the drugs in that class, it shall be added to that class and
shall not be subject to prior authorization. A prescriber who does not endorse
the preferred drug list is subject to a broader scope of prior authorization as
determined by the director.

(2) The department may
subject drugs identified in section 4(2) of this act to prior authorization
where clinically indicated.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
10. A new section is added
to chapter 51.36 RCW to read as follows:

(1) The department may
subject any drug in a class included in section 4 of this act to prior
authorization in only limited circumstances, such as when the drug is high
cost, has a narrow therapeutic indication, presents a risk of inappropriate
utilization, or poses safety concerns. A new drug that has not yet been
reviewed under section 4 of this act shall be made available by the department
but may be subject to prior authorization where clinically indicated to avoid
health risks to patients. When a new drug in a class that is included in the
preferred drug list has been reviewed, and has been found to be therapeutically
equivalent to the drugs in that class, it shall be added to that class and
shall not be subject to prior authorization. A prescriber who does not endorse
the preferred drug list is subject to a broader scope of prior authorization as
determined by the director.

(2) The department may
subject drugs identified in section 4(2) of this act to prior authorization
where clinically indicated.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
11. A new section is added
to chapter 41.05 RCW to read as follows:

Any prior approval
process adopted pursuant to sections 5 through 10 of this act must include
clear standards and procedures for a process to ensure consumer access to
medically necessary nonpreferred drugs. No preferred drug list can account for
every therapeutic eventuality or unique patient need. Prior approval
procedures for nonpreferred drugs must neither pose a substantial barrier to
the prescribing health care professional nor hinder the consumer's ability to
receive necessary medication in a safe and timely manner. A prior authorization
program must provide for: (1) A response within twenty-four hours after
receipt of a request for prior authorization; and (2) the dispensing of at
least a seventy-two hour supply of the requested drug in an emergency
situation.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
12. A new section is added
to chapter 41.05 RCW to read as follows:

To complement the
preferred drug program established in section 4 of this act, the administrator
must, in concert with state agencies involved in state purchased health care:

(1) Implement a program
of academic detailing and client counterdetailing that educates physicians and
other prescribers, and clients of state purchased health care, on the
cost-effective utilization of prescription drugs on the preferred drug list;

(2) By July 1, 2004,
use electronic drug claims processing and information retrieval systems to
analyze pharmacy and medical claims to identify those prescribers who request
that prescriptions for nonpreferred drugs be dispensed as written on a more
frequent basis than their peers, and provide information and early educational
intervention to those prescribers as needed to improve the system and
prescribing practices. The state agencies participating in the preferred drug
program shall not impose any sanction or take any punitive action against a
prescriber who requests that prescriptions for nonpreferred drugs be dispensed
as written on a more frequent basis than their peers when the prescriber can
justify their prescription profile based on best medical practices; and

(3) Conduct a
feasibility study of developing a system to periodically provide a complete
drug profile of persons covered through state purchased health care systems to
health care providers caring for those persons.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
13. A new section is added
to chapter 41.05 RCW to read as follows:

(1) A pharmacy and
therapeutics committee is established to assist the administrator, and other
agencies involved in state purchased health care, in the development and
implementation of a preferred drug program.

(2) The committee
consists of nine members, to be appointed by the governor as follows:

(a) Four physicians
licensed under chapter 18.57 or 18.71 RCW in this state and actively engaged in
the practice of medicine, at least one of whom is employed by a carrier as
defined in RCW 48.43.005, chosen from a list of nominees provided by the
Washington state medical association;

(b) One advanced
registered nurse practitioner licensed in this state and actively engaged in
the practice of nursing chosen from a list of nominees provided by the
Washington state nurses association;

(c) Three pharmacists
licensed in this state and actively engaged in the practice of pharmacy chosen
from a list of nominees provided by the Washington state pharmacists
association; and

(d) One person with
background experience, education, or expertise in pharmacoeconomics.

(3) No member of the
committee may be employed by or receive remuneration, grants, or other
compensation from a pharmaceutical manufacturer, or be employed by the state of
Washington by any agency administering "state purchased health care,"
as defined in RCW 41.05.011.

(4) Committee members
serve staggered three-year terms. Of the initial members, one physician, the
advanced registered nurse practitioner, and one pharmacist must each be
appointed for two-year terms, and one physician and one pharmacist must each be
appointed for one-year terms. The remaining committee members must be
appointed for three-year terms. Members may be reappointed for a period not to
exceed three three-year terms. Vacancies on the committee must be filled for
the balance of the unexpired term from nominee lists for the appropriate
committee category as provided under subsection (2) of this section.

(5) Committee members
must select a chair and a vice-chair on an annual basis from the committee
membership.

(6) The administrator
must enter into a confidentiality agreement with any private contractor or
state employee who has access to proprietary or confidential nonpublished data
that is in the custody of the pharmacy and therapeutics committee established
under this section. The failure of any contractor to adhere to the terms of
the confidentiality agreement is grounds for termination of the contract by the
administrator. Unauthorized disclosure of proprietary or confidential
nonpublished data by any contractor or their employee, or by any employee of a
state agency, is punishable as a class C felony.

(7) The authority shall
provide staff support to the committee. Committee members shall be compensated
for their service and shall be reimbursed for expenses pursuant to RCW
43.03.050 and 43.03.060.

(8) The members of the
committee are immune from civil liability for any official acts performed in
good faith as members of the committee.

(9) The committee must:

(a) Recommend to the
administrator, and other agencies involved in state purchased health care,
which drugs should be identified as preferred drugs from among those determined,
pursuant to section 4(3) of this act, to be essentially equal in terms of
safety and efficacy. In updating the preferred drug list, the pharmacy and
therapeutics committee shall complete its review and submit recommendations to
the administrator within one hundred twenty days from the date of receipt of
the dossier under section 4 of this act. In making these recommendations, the
committee must consider, among other factors, the relative cost of the drugs
being considered, and the impact of each drug on the state's overall health
care expenditures.

(b) Make
recommendations regarding the rules to be adopted by the administrator and
other state agencies involved in state purchased health care to implement the
preferred drug program; and

(c) Make recommendations
regarding the preferred drug list development and review process, and program
implementation, as necessary to achieve the objectives of this act.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
14. A new section is added
to chapter 41.05 RCW to read as follows:

The administrator must
design, in concert with state agencies involved in state purchased
fee-for-service health care, a uniform drug utilization review program for
state purchased health care that meets the requirement of Title XIX of the
social security act. Each state agency that purchases or provides health care
services must adopt the uniform drug utilization review program for its
fee-for-service purchasing and may implement it directly or by contract or
interagency agreement. The program must include but is not limited to
prescription drug review, management, and education, including prospective,
concurrent, and retrospective review, to improve the quality of pharmaceutical
care by ensuring that prescription drugs provided through state purchased
fee-for-service health care programs advance quality clinical outcomes and are
appropriate, medically necessary, and not likely to produce adverse medical
results. Drugs exempted from the preferred drug list under section 4(2) of this
act may be included in the drug utilization review program. The program also
must identify clients utilizing large numbers of prescription drugs, and
develop strategies to enhance coordination of care for these individuals.

(1) The administrator
shall establish a drug utilization review committee either directly or through
a contract with a private organization to assist in development and
implementation of the drug utilization review program. The committee must be
composed primarily of actively practicing health care professionals.
Additional specialty expertise must be obtained as needed. Employees of
agencies that purchase health services cannot be a member of the drug
utilization review committee but will provide staff support to the committee.
Upon establishment of the committee, the department of social and health
services shall disband the drug utilization review committee under the medical
assistance administration.

(2) Nothing in chapter
42.30 RCW prevents the drug utilization review committee from holding an
executive session during a regular or special meeting of the committee to
review and discuss proprietary or confidential nonpublished data that relates
to development or implementation of the drug utilization review program.

(3) The administrator
must enter into a confidentiality agreement with any private contractor or
state employee who has access to proprietary or confidential nonpublished data
that is in the custody of any drug utilization review committee established
under this section. The failure of any contractor to adhere to the terms of
the confidentiality agreement is grounds for termination of the contract by the
administrator. Unauthorized disclosure of proprietary or confidential
nonpublished data by any contractor or their employee, or by any employee of a
state agency, is punishable as a class C felony.

(4) A person who serves
on a drug utilization review committee established under this section is immune
from civil liability for actions taken in good faith as a member of the
committee.

Sec. 15. RCW 42.30.110 and 2001 c
216 s 1 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) Nothing contained
in this chapter may be construed to prevent a governing body from holding an
executive session during a regular or special meeting:

(a) To consider matters
affecting national security;

(b) To consider the
selection of a site or the acquisition of real estate by lease or purchase when
public knowledge regarding such consideration would cause a likelihood of
increased price;

(c) To consider the
minimum price at which real estate will be offered for sale or lease when
public knowledge regarding such consideration would cause a likelihood of
decreased price. However, final action selling or leasing public property
shall be taken in a meeting open to the public;

(d) To review
negotiations on the performance of publicly bid contracts when public knowledge
regarding such consideration would cause a likelihood of increased costs;

(e) To consider, in the
case of an export trading company, financial and commercial information
supplied by private persons to the export trading company;

(f) To receive and
evaluate complaints or charges brought against a public officer or employee.
However, upon the request of such officer or employee, a public hearing or a
meeting open to the public shall be conducted upon such complaint or charge;

(g) To evaluate the
qualifications of an applicant for public employment or to review the
performance of a public employee. However, subject to RCW 42.30.140(4),
discussion by a governing body of salaries, wages, and other conditions of
employment to be generally applied within the agency shall occur in a meeting
open to the public, and when a governing body elects to take final action
hiring, setting the salary of an individual employee or class of employees, or
discharging or disciplining an employee, that action shall be taken in a
meeting open to the public;

(h) To evaluate the
qualifications of a candidate for appointment to elective office. However, any
interview of such candidate and final action appointing a candidate to elective
office shall be in a meeting open to the public;

(i) To discuss with
legal counsel representing the agency matters relating to agency enforcement
actions, or to discuss with legal counsel representing the agency litigation or
potential litigation to which the agency, the governing body, or a member
acting in an official capacity is, or is likely to become, a party, when public
knowledge regarding the discussion is likely to result in an adverse legal or
financial consequence to the agency.

This subsection (1)(i)
does not permit a governing body to hold an executive session solely because an
attorney representing the agency is present. For purposes of this subsection
(1)(i), "potential litigation" means matters protected by RPC 1.6 or
RCW 5.60.060(2)(a) concerning:

(A) Litigation that has
been specifically threatened to which the agency, the governing body, or a
member acting in an official capacity is, or is likely to become, a party;

(B) Litigation that the
agency reasonably believes may be commenced by or against the agency, the
governing body, or a member acting in an official capacity; or

(C) Litigation or legal
risks of a proposed action or current practice that the agency has identified
when public discussion of the litigation or legal risks is likely to result in
an adverse legal or financial consequence to the agency;

(j) To consider, in the
case of the state library commission or its advisory bodies, western library
network prices, products, equipment, and services, when such discussion would
be likely to adversely affect the network's ability to conduct business in a
competitive economic climate. However, final action on these matters shall be
taken in a meeting open to the public;

(k) To consider, in the
case of the state investment board, financial and commercial information when
the information relates to the investment of public trust or retirement funds
and when public knowledge regarding the discussion would result in loss to such
funds or in private loss to the providers of this information;

(l) To consider, in
the case of the pharmacy and therapeutics committee established in section 13
of this act or the drug utilization review committee established in section 14
of this act, proprietary or confidential nonpublished information that relates
to the development or revision of the preferred drug list, the designation of a
drug for prior authorization, or the conduct of the drug utilization review
program.

(2) Before convening in
executive session, the presiding officer of a governing body shall publicly
announce the purpose for excluding the public from the meeting place, and the
time when the executive session will be concluded. The executive session may
be extended to a stated later time by announcement of the presiding officer.

Sec. 16. RCW 41.05.026 and 1991 c
79 s 1 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) When soliciting
proposals for the purpose of awarding contracts for goods or services, the
administrator shall, upon written request by the bidder, exempt from public
inspection and copying such proprietary data, trade secrets, or other
information contained in the bidder's proposal that relate to the bidder's
unique methods of conducting business or of determining prices or premium rates
to be charged for services under terms of the proposal.

(2) Actuarial formulas,
statistics, cost and utilization data, or other proprietary information
submitted upon request of the administrator or board by a contracting insurer,
health care service contractor, health maintenance organization, or vendor may
be withheld at any time from public inspection when necessary to preserve trade
secrets or prevent unfair competition.

(3) Proprietary
information submitted upon request of the administrator or the pharmacy and
therapeutics committee established under section 13 of this act by any vendor
or pharmaceutical manufacturer for the purpose of analyzing and developing
prescription drug education and utilization systems, a preferred drug list, a
drug utilization review program, and consolidated prescription drug purchasing
for state purchased health care programs may be withheld at any time from
public inspection when necessary to preserve trade secrets or prevent unfair
competition.

(4) The board,
the pharmacy and therapeutics committee established in section 13 of this act,
or the drug utilization review committee established in section 14 of this act
may hold an executive session in accordance with chapter 42.30 RCW
during any regular or special meeting to discuss information submitted in
accordance with subsection (1) ((or)), (2), or (3) of this
section.

(5) A person who
challenges a request for or designation of information as exempt under this
section is entitled to seek judicial review pursuant to chapter 42.17 RCW.

Sec. 17. RCW 42.17.310 and 2001 c
278 s 1, 2001 c 98 s 2, and 2001 c 70 s 1 are each reenacted and amended to
read as follows:

(1) The following are
exempt from public inspection and copying:

(a) Personal
information in any files maintained for students in public schools, patients or
clients of public institutions or public health agencies, or welfare
recipients.

(b) Personal
information in files maintained for employees, appointees, or elected officials
of any public agency to the extent that disclosure would violate their right to
privacy.

(c) Information
required of any taxpayer in connection with the assessment or collection of any
tax if the disclosure of the information to other persons would (i) be
prohibited to such persons by RCW 84.08.210, 82.32.330, 84.40.020, or 84.40.340
or (ii) violate the taxpayer's right to privacy or result in unfair competitive
disadvantage to the taxpayer.

(d) Specific
intelligence information and specific investigative records compiled by investigative,
law enforcement, and penology agencies, and state agencies vested with the
responsibility to discipline members of any profession, the nondisclosure of
which is essential to effective law enforcement or for the protection of any
person's right to privacy.

(e) Information
revealing the identity of persons who are witnesses to or victims of crime or
who file complaints with investigative, law enforcement, or penology agencies,
other than the public disclosure commission, if disclosure would endanger any
person's life, physical safety, or property. If at the time a complaint is
filed the complainant, victim or witness indicates a desire for disclosure or
nondisclosure, such desire shall govern. However, all complaints filed with
the public disclosure commission about any elected official or candidate for
public office must be made in writing and signed by the complainant under oath.

(f) Test questions,
scoring keys, and other examination data used to administer a license,
employment, or academic examination.

(g) Except as provided
by chapter 8.26 RCW, the contents of real estate appraisals, made for or by any
agency relative to the acquisition or sale of property, until the project or
prospective sale is abandoned or until such time as all of the property has
been acquired or the property to which the sale appraisal relates is sold, but
in no event shall disclosure be denied for more than three years after the
appraisal.

(h) Valuable formulae,
designs, drawings, computer source code or object code, and research data
obtained by any agency within five years of the request for disclosure when
disclosure would produce private gain and public loss.

(i) Preliminary drafts,
notes, recommendations, and intra-agency memorandums in which opinions are
expressed or policies formulated or recommended except that a specific record
shall not be exempt when publicly cited by an agency in connection with any
agency action.

(j) Records which are
relevant to a controversy to which an agency is a party but which records would
not be available to another party under the rules of pretrial discovery for
causes pending in the superior courts.

(k) Records, maps, or
other information identifying the location of archaeological sites in order to
avoid the looting or depredation of such sites.

(l) Any library record,
the primary purpose of which is to maintain control of library materials, or to
gain access to information, which discloses or could be used to disclose the
identity of a library user.

(m) Financial
information supplied by or on behalf of a person, firm, or corporation for the
purpose of qualifying to submit a bid or proposal for (i) a ferry system
construction or repair contract as required by RCW 47.60.680 through 47.60.750
or (ii) highway construction or improvement as required by RCW 47.28.070.

(n) Railroad company
contracts filed prior to July 28, 1991, with the utilities and transportation
commission under RCW 81.34.070, except that the summaries of the contracts are
open to public inspection and copying as otherwise provided by this chapter.

(o) Financial and
commercial information and records supplied by private persons pertaining to
export services provided pursuant to chapter 43.163 RCW and chapter 53.31 RCW,
and by persons pertaining to export projects pursuant to RCW 43.23.035.

(p) Financial
disclosures filed by private vocational schools under chapters 28B.85 and
28C.10 RCW.

(q) Records filed with
the utilities and transportation commission or attorney general under RCW
80.04.095 that a court has determined are confidential under RCW 80.04.095.

(r) Financial and
commercial information and records supplied by businesses or individuals during
application for loans or program services provided by chapters 43.163, 43.160,
43.330, and 43.168 RCW, or during application for economic development loans or
program services provided by any local agency.

(s) Membership lists or
lists of members or owners of interests of units in timeshare projects,
subdivisions, camping resorts, condominiums, land developments, or
common-interest communities affiliated with such projects, regulated by the
department of licensing, in the files or possession of the department.

(t) All applications
for public employment, including the names of applicants, resumes, and other
related materials submitted with respect to an applicant.

(u) The residential
addresses or residential telephone numbers of employees or volunteers of a
public agency which are held by any public agency in personnel records, public
employment related records, or volunteer rosters, or are included in any
mailing list of employees or volunteers of any public agency.

(v) The residential
addresses and residential telephone numbers of the customers of a public
utility contained in the records or lists held by the public utility of which
they are customers, except that this information may be released to the
division of child support or the agency or firm providing child support
enforcement for another state under Title IV-D of the federal social security
act, for the establishment, enforcement, or modification of a support order.

(w)(i) The federal
social security number of individuals governed under chapter 18.130 RCW
maintained in the files of the department of health, except this exemption does
not apply to requests made directly to the department from federal, state, and
local agencies of government, and national and state licensing, credentialing,
investigatory, disciplinary, and examination organizations; (ii) the current
residential address and current residential telephone number of a health care
provider governed under chapter 18.130 RCW maintained in the files of the
department, if the provider requests that this information be withheld from
public inspection and copying, and provides to the department an accurate
alternate or business address and business telephone number. On or after
January 1, 1995, the current residential address and residential telephone
number of a health care provider governed under RCW 18.130.040 maintained in
the files of the department shall automatically be withheld from public
inspection and copying unless the provider specifically requests the
information be released, and except as provided for under RCW 42.17.260(9).

(x) Information
obtained by the board of pharmacy as provided in RCW 69.45.090.

(y) Information
obtained by the board of pharmacy or the department of health and its representatives
as provided in RCW 69.41.044, 69.41.280, and 18.64.420.

(z) Financial
information, business plans, examination reports, and any information produced
or obtained in evaluating or examining a business and industrial development
corporation organized or seeking certification under chapter 31.24 RCW.

(aa) Financial and
commercial information supplied to the state investment board by any person
when the information relates to the investment of public trust or retirement
funds and when disclosure would result in loss to such funds or in private loss
to the providers of this information.

(bb) Financial and
valuable trade information under RCW 51.36.120.

(cc) Client records
maintained by an agency that is a domestic violence program as defined in RCW
70.123.020 or 70.123.075 or a rape crisis center as defined in RCW 70.125.030.

(dd) Information that
identifies a person who, while an agency employee: (i) Seeks advice, under an
informal process established by the employing agency, in order to ascertain his
or her rights in connection with a possible unfair practice under chapter 49.60
RCW against the person; and (ii) requests his or her identity or any
identifying information not be disclosed.

(ee) Investigative
records compiled by an employing agency conducting a current investigation of a
possible unfair practice under chapter 49.60 RCW or of a possible violation of
other federal, state, or local laws prohibiting discrimination in employment.

(ff) Business related
information protected from public inspection and copying under RCW 15.86.110.

(gg) Financial,
commercial, operations, and technical and research information and data
submitted to or obtained by the clean Washington center in applications for, or
delivery of, program services under chapter 70.95H RCW.

(hh) Information and
documents created specifically for, and collected and maintained by a quality
improvement committee pursuant to RCW 43.70.510 or 70.41.200, or by a peer
review committee under RCW 4.24.250, regardless of which agency is in
possession of the information and documents.

(ii) Personal
information in files maintained in a data base created under RCW 43.07.360.

(jj) Financial and
commercial information requested by the public stadium authority from any
person or organization that leases or uses the stadium and exhibition center as
defined in RCW 36.102.010.

(kk) Names of
individuals residing in emergency or transitional housing that are furnished to
the department of revenue or a county assessor in order to substantiate a claim
for property tax exemption under RCW 84.36.043.

(ll) The names,
residential addresses, residential telephone numbers, and other individually
identifiable records held by an agency in relation to a vanpool, carpool, or
other ride-sharing program or service. However, these records may be disclosed
to other persons who apply for ride-matching services and who need that
information in order to identify potential riders or drivers with whom to share
rides.

(mm) The personally
identifying information of current or former participants or applicants in a
paratransit or other transit service operated for the benefit of persons with
disabilities or elderly persons.

(nn) The personally
identifying information of persons who acquire and use transit passes and other
fare payment media including, but not limited to, stored value smart cards and
magnetic strip cards, except that an agency may disclose this information to a
person, employer, educational institution, or other entity that is responsible,
in whole or in part, for payment of the cost of acquiring or using a transit
pass or other fare payment media, or to the news media when reporting on public
transportation or public safety. This information may also be disclosed at the
agency's discretion to governmental agencies or groups concerned with public
transportation or public safety.

(oo) Proprietary
financial and commercial information that the submitting entity, with review by
the department of health, specifically identifies at the time it is submitted
and that is provided to or obtained by the department of health in connection
with an application for, or the supervision of, an antitrust exemption sought
by the submitting entity under RCW 43.72.310. If a request for such
information is received, the submitting entity must be notified of the
request. Within ten business days of receipt of the notice, the submitting
entity shall provide a written statement of the continuing need for
confidentiality, which shall be provided to the requester. Upon receipt of such
notice, the department of health shall continue to treat information designated
under this section as exempt from disclosure. If the requester initiates an
action to compel disclosure under this chapter, the submitting entity must be
joined as a party to demonstrate the continuing need for confidentiality.

(pp) Records maintained
by the board of industrial insurance appeals that are related to appeals of
crime victims' compensation claims filed with the board under RCW 7.68.110.

(qq) Financial and commercial
information supplied by or on behalf of a person, firm, corporation, or entity
under chapter 28B.95 RCW relating to the purchase or sale of tuition units and
contracts for the purchase of multiple tuition units.

(rr) Any records of
investigative reports prepared by any state, county, municipal, or other law
enforcement agency pertaining to sex offenses contained in chapter 9A.44 RCW or
sexually violent offenses as defined in RCW 71.09.020, which have been
transferred to the Washington association of sheriffs and police chiefs for
permanent electronic retention and retrieval pursuant to RCW 40.14.070(2)(b).

(ss) Credit card
numbers, debit card numbers, electronic check numbers, card expiration dates,
or bank or other financial account numbers supplied to an agency for the
purpose of electronic transfer of funds, except when disclosure is expressly
required by law.

(tt) Financial
information, including but not limited to account numbers and values, and other
identification numbers supplied by or on behalf of a person, firm, corporation,
limited liability company, partnership, or other entity related to an
application for a liquor license, gambling license, or lottery retail license.

(uu) Records maintained
by the employment security department and subject to chapter 50.13 RCW if
provided to another individual or organization for operational, research, or
evaluation purposes.

(vv) Individually
identifiable information received by the work force training and education
coordinating board for research or evaluation purposes.

(ww) Those portions of
records containing specific and unique vulnerability assessments or specific
and unique response plans, either of which is intended to prevent or mitigate
criminal terrorist acts as defined in RCW 70.74.285, the public disclosure of
which would have a substantial likelihood of threatening public safety.

(xx) Commercial fishing
catch data from logbooks required to be provided to the department of fish and
wildlife under RCW 77.12.047, when the data identifies specific catch location,
timing, or methodology and the release of which would result in unfair
competitive disadvantage to the commercial fisher providing the catch data.
However, this information may be released to government agencies concerned with
the management of fish and wildlife resources.

(yy) Sensitive wildlife
data obtained by the department of fish and wildlife. However, sensitive
wildlife data may be released to government agencies concerned with the
management of fish and wildlife resources. Sensitive wildlife data includes:

(i) The nesting sites
or specific locations of endangered species designated under RCW 77.12.020, or
threatened or sensitive species classified by rule of the department of fish
and wildlife;

(ii) Radio frequencies
used in, or locational data generated by, telemetry studies; or

(iii) Other location
data that could compromise the viability of a specific fish or wildlife
population, and where at least one of the following criteria are met:

(A) The species has a
known commercial or black market value;

(B) There is a history
of malicious take of that species; or

(C) There is a known
demand to visit, take, or disturb, and the species behavior or ecology renders
it especially vulnerable or the species has an extremely limited distribution
and concentration.

(zz) The personally
identifying information of persons who acquire recreational licenses under RCW
77.32.010 or commercial licenses under chapter 77.65 or 77.70 RCW, except name,
address of contact used by the department, and type of license, endorsement, or
tag. However, the department of fish and wildlife may disclose personally
identifying information to:

(i) Government agencies
concerned with the management of fish and wildlife resources;

(ii) The department of
social and health services, child support division, and to the department of
licensing in order to implement RCW 77.32.014 and 46.20.291; and

(iii) Law enforcement
agencies for the purpose of firearm possession enforcement under RCW 9.41.040.

(aaa) Information
obtained by the health care authority or the pharmacy and therapeutics
committee under RCW 41.05.026.

(2) Except for
information described in subsection (1)(c)(i) of this section and confidential
income data exempted from public inspection pursuant to RCW 84.40.020, the
exemptions of this section are inapplicable to the extent that information, the
disclosure of which would violate personal privacy or vital governmental
interests, can be deleted from the specific records sought. No exemption may
be construed to permit the nondisclosure of statistical information not
descriptive of any readily identifiable person or persons.

(3) Inspection or
copying of any specific records exempt under the provisions of this section may
be permitted if the superior court in the county in which the record is
maintained finds, after a hearing with notice thereof to every person in
interest and the agency, that the exemption of such records is clearly unnecessary
to protect any individual's right of privacy or any vital governmental
function.

(4) Agency responses
refusing, in whole or in part, inspection of any public record shall include a
statement of the specific exemption authorizing the withholding of the record
(or part) and a brief explanation of how the exemption applies to the record
withheld.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
18. A new section is added
to chapter 41.05 RCW to read as follows:

(1) The administrator
is authorized to engage in consolidated prescription drug purchasing. The
authority granted the administrator by this section shall be liberally
construed to achieve the purposes of this act.

(2) Within one year
following initial adoption of the preferred drug list for state purchased
health care, units of local government, private entities, and individuals who
lack prescription drug coverage must be offered an opportunity to participate
on a purely voluntary basis in the purchasing cooperative resulting from
adoption of the preferred drug list. The administrator may charge reasonable
administrative fees to units of local government and private entities who
choose to participate in the purchasing cooperative.

(3) For purposes of
this section, "voluntary participation" for individuals who lack
prescription drug coverage means that, following payment of a reasonable annual
enrollment fee, these individuals can benefit from any price discounts obtained
from prescription drug manufacturers through adoption of the preferred drug
list. The administrator must develop mechanisms to ensure that pharmacies
filling prescriptions for individuals participating voluntarily in the
purchasing cooperative recover any discounts given to these individuals through
their participation in the cooperative.

(4) The administrator
shall establish an advisory committee representing units of local government,
organized labor, private entities, and consumers to develop an implementation
plan for the opportunity to participate as authorized by this subsection (4).
The advisory committee shall submit an implementation plan to the appropriate
committees of the senate and house of representatives by September 15, 2003.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
19. A new section is added
to chapter 41.05 RCW to read as follows:

The consolidated
prescription drug purchasing account is created in the custody of the state
treasurer. All receipts from the fees from the preferred drug purchasing
cooperative created in section 18 of this act must be deposited into the
account. Expenditures from the account may be used only for the purposes of
this act. Only the administrator or the administrator's designee may authorize
expenditures from the account. The account is subject to allotment procedures
under chapter 43.88 RCW, but an appropriation is not required for expenditures.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
20. A new section is added
to chapter 41.05 RCW to read as follows:

The administrator, in
concert with agencies involved in state purchased health care, must design and
implement at least two, but not more than five, pilot disease management
programs for persons covered through state purchased health care programs. The
programs must begin operation by July 1, 2003.

(1) The administrator,
in concert with agencies involved in state purchased health care, must
determine the disease groups most appropriate for disease management and the
state purchased health care programs to which the disease management programs
will apply, after reviewing claims and cost information and research on the
effectiveness of disease management programs. The following disease groups
should first be considered for disease management programs: Asthma, diabetes,
cardiovascular disease, malignancies, mental disorders, obesity, hemophilia,
renal disease, transplants, intervertebral disc disorders, and populations at
highest risk of improper use of medication.

(2) Each pilot disease
management program must include physicians, pharmacists, and other appropriate
health care providers in the design and implementation of the program. Drug
classes exempted under section 4(2) of this act must be integrated into disease
management programs as appropriate. Providers may not be required to
participate in a disease management program as a condition of contracting to
provide state purchased health care services.

(3) The programs must
incorporate an evaluation component that allows the administrator to identify
successful programs that are candidates for statewide expansion. The
evaluation should consider the impact of the disease management program upon
the health status of participating enrollees, the use of health services by
these enrollees, the coverage of comorbidities associated with the selected disease
group, and the overall costs of treating these enrollees.

(4) In addition to the
pilot projects established under this section, the administrator and the
secretary of the department of social and health services must give strong
consideration to including participation in the alliance working for antibiotic
resistance education project as a provision of managed care plan contracts for
the public employees' benefits board, basic health plan, medical assistance, or
children's health insurance programs for contract years beginning in calendar
year 2003.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
21. A new section is added
to chapter 41.05 RCW to read as follows:

Any savings to health
care benefit programs administered by the public employees' benefits board that
result from implementation of the prescription drug education and utilization
system under this act must be deposited into the public employees' and
retirees' insurance account established under RCW 41.05.120. In developing its
annual budget proposal for public employee health benefits, the administrator
must consider the extent to which implementation of the preferred drug program
has moderated increases in public employee health benefit costs and attempt to
reflect that moderation in employee cost-sharing.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
22. A new section is added
to chapter 41.05 RCW to read as follows:

(1) By January 1, 2003,
the administrator must submit to the governor and the health care and fiscal
committees of the legislature a progress report regarding the implementation of
the prescription drug education and utilization system. The report must include
a description of the extent to which the evidence-based review has been
incorporated into the preferred drug list, and any prior authorization policies
or procedures that have been developed.

(2) By January 1, 2004,
and January 1, 2005, the administrator must submit to the governor and the
health care and fiscal committees of the legislature a report on the impacts of
the prescription drug education and utilization system. The report must
address whether the activities under this act have succeeded in promoting
improved clinical outcomes and cost-effective drug utilization and report
specifically on the status and outcomes associated with the pilot disease
management programs established under section 20 of this act. The report must
include a description of the extent to which the evidence-based review has been
incorporated into the preferred drug list, and any prior authorization policies
or procedures that have been developed. The report may present recommendations
for modifications to the system, or for additional strategies that should be
pursued to promote therapeutic and cost-effective utilization of prescription
drugs by residents of the state of Washington.

(3) By January 1, 2003,
the secretary of the department of social and health services shall submit to
the governor and the health care and fiscal committees of the legislature a
report on implementation and operation of the therapeutic consultation
program. The report must include, at a minimum, a description of the impact of
the program on medical assistance clients and providers and any cost savings
associated with the program, and recommendations as to when the program should
be discontinued, in whole or in part.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
23. A new section is added
to chapter 41.05 RCW to read as follows:

The administrator shall
contract with an independent entity to evaluate the implementation and impacts
of the prescription drug education and utilization system established in this
act.

(1) The evaluation
shall assess:

(a) The degree to which
the program has influenced prescription drug prescribing practices among health
care providers in Washington, including a description of how prescribing
practices may have changed;

(b) The impact of the
program on quality of care and clinical outcomes for persons enrolled in state
purchased health care programs;

(c) The extent to which
the program has lessened administrative burdens on health care providers
participating in state purchased health care programs;

(d) The impact of the
program on prescription drug expenditures across state purchased health care
programs;

(e) The impact of the
program on the utilization of, and expenditures for, other health care services
funded by state purchased health care programs.

(2) The administrator
may include the evaluation of disease management programs required under
section 20 of this act in the evaluation under this section.

(3) The administrator
shall make every effort to pursue and obtain federal or private foundation
funding for the evaluation from entities such as the federal agency for health
care research and quality or the milbank memorial fund. To ensure that results
of the evaluation are objective and unbiased, private foundation funds derived
from the pharmaceutical industry may not be used to fund the evaluation.

(4) The results of the
evaluation shall be submitted to the governor and legislature by January 1,
2006.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
24. A new section is added
to chapter 69.41 RCW to read as follows:

Any pharmacist filling
a prescription under the preferred drug list program established under section
4 of this act or under section 18 of this act from a prescriber who has
endorsed the preferred drug list must substitute the preferred drug for any
nonpreferred drug in a given therapeutic category, unless the prescriber has
indicated on the prescription that the nonpreferred drug must be dispensed as
written, in which case the pharmacist must dispense the nonpreferred drug as written.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
25. A new section is added
to chapter 41.05 RCW to read as follows:

Nothing in this act
preempts state-owned or managed hospitals licensed under chapter 70.41 RCW from
aggregate purchasing through other programs. These hospitals may choose to
participate in the preferred drug purchasing program under this act if drugs
can be obtained at lower cost.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
26. A new section is added
to chapter 43.60A RCW to read as follows:

Nothing in this act
preempts state-owned facilities and programs operated by the department of
veterans affairs from aggregate purchasing through other programs. The
department may choose to participate in the preferred drug program under section
4 of this act if drugs can be obtained at lower cost.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
27. If any provision of this
act or its application to any person or circumstance is held invalid, the
remainder of the act or the application of the provision to other persons or
circumstances is not affected.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
28. If any part of this act
is found to be in conflict with federal requirements that are a prescribed
condition to the allocation of federal funds to the state, the conflicting part
of this act is inoperative solely to the extent of the conflict and with
respect to the agencies directly affected, and this finding does not affect the
operation of the remainder of this act in its application to the agencies
concerned. Rules adopted under this act must meet federal requirements that
are a necessary condition to the receipt of federal funds by the state.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
29. This act is necessary for
the immediate preservation of the public peace, health, or safety, or support
of the state government and its existing public institutions, and takes effect
immediately.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 30. If specific funding for
the purposes of this act, referencing this act by bill or chapter number, is
not provided by June 30, 2002, in the omnibus appropriations act, this act is
null and void.

---
END ---