BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF
WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1. RCW 77.32.256 and 1995 c
116 s 6 are each amended to read as follows:

The
director shall by rule establish the conditions and fees for issuance of
duplicate licenses, rebates, permits, tags, and stamps required by this
chapter. The fee for ((a duplicate provided under this section is ten
dollars for those licenses that are ten dollars and over, and for those
licenses under ten dollars the duplicate fee is the value of the license)) duplicate
licenses, rebates, permits, tags, and stamps may not exceed the actual cost to
the department for issuing the duplicate.

--- END ---