BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF
WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec.
1. A new section is added
to chapter 77.32 RCW to read as follows:

A group fishing permit
allows a group of individuals to fish and harvest shellfish without individual
licenses or the payment of individual license fees. The director may issue a
group fishing permit to a licensed, state-operated, or nonprofit facility that
serves physically or mentally disabled persons, mentally ill persons, hospital
patients, handicapped persons, seriously or terminally ill persons, or senior
citizens.

The commission must
adopt rules that provide the conditions under which a group fishing permit may
be issued.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 2. RCW 77.32.235 (Group permits--Exemption
from individual license and fee requirement--Conditions) and 1998 c 191 s 20,
1990 c 35 s 4, & 1984 c 33 s 1 are each repealed.

---
END ---