BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF
WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec.
1. (1) The legislature
finds:

(a) The continued
economic vitality of downtown and neighborhood commercial districts in our
state's cities is essential to community preservation, social cohesion, and
economic growth;

(b) In recent years
there has been a deterioration of downtown and neighborhood commercial
districts in both rural and urban communities due to a shifting population
base, changes in the marketplace, and greater competition from suburban shopping
malls, discount centers, and through the internet;

(c) This decline has
eroded the ability of businesses and property owners to renovate and enhance
their commercial and residential properties;

(d) In many areas of
the state, downtown and neighborhood commercial areas are burdened further by
deteriorating buildings, vacant building that cannot be legally occupied, and
vacant brownfield infill sites which pose significant health and safety problems
to tenants and pedestrians, and constitute a significant blight and detrimental
impact on the health, safety, and welfare of the community, as well as its
economic health;

(e) Business owners in
these districts need to maintain their local economies in order to provide
goods and services to adjacent residents, to provide employment opportunities,
to restore blighted properties, and to avoid disinvestment and economic
dislocations, and have developed downtown and neighborhood commercial district
revitalization programs to address these problems; and

(f) It is in the best
interest of the state of Washington to stop the decay of community areas and to
promote and facilitate the orderly redevelopment of these areas.

(2) It is the intent of
the legislature to establish a program to:

(a) Provide for the
allocation of a portion of locally imposed excise taxes to assist local
governments in the financing of needed health and safety improvements, public
improvements, and other public investments, to encourage private development
and to enhance and revitalize neighborhood business districts and downtown
areas; and

(b) Provide technical
assistance and training to local governments, business organizations, downtown
and neighborhood commercial district organizations, and business and property
owners to accomplish community and economic revitalization and development of
business districts.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
2. The definitions in this
section apply throughout this chapter unless the context clearly requires
otherwise.

(1) "Local retail
sales and use tax" means the tax levied by a city or town under RCW
82.14.030, excluding that portion which a county is entitled to receive under
RCW 82.14.030.

(2) "Local retail
sales and use tax increment revenue" means that portion of the local
retail sales and use tax collected in each year upon any retail sale or any use
of an article of tangible personal property within a downtown or neighborhood
commercial district that is in excess of the amount of local retail sales and
use tax collected on sales or uses within the downtown or neighborhood
commercial district in the year preceding.

(3) "Downtown or
neighborhood commercial district" means (a) an area or areas designated by
the legislative authority of a city or town with a population over one hundred
thousand and that are typically limited to the pedestrian core area or the
central commercial district and compact business districts that serve specific
neighborhoods within the city or town; or (b) commercial areas designated as
main street areas by the office of trade and economic development.

(4) "Community
revitalization project" means:

(a) Health and safety
improvements authorized to be publicly financed under chapter 35.80 or 35.81
RCW;

(b) Publicly owned or
leased facilities within the jurisdiction of a local government which the
sponsor has authority to provide; and

(c) Expenditure for any
of the following purposes:

(i) Providing
environmental analysis, professional management, planning, and promotion within
a downtown or neighborhood commercial district including the management and
promotion of retail trade activities in the district;

(ii) Providing
maintenance and security for common or public areas in the downtown or
neighborhood commercial district;

(iii) Historic
preservation activities authorized under RCW 35.21.395; or

(iv) Project design and
planning, land acquisition, site preparation, construction, reconstruction,
rehabilitation, improvement, operation, and installation of a public facility;
the costs of financing, including interest during construction, legal and other
professional services, taxes, and insurance; the costs of complying with this
chapter and other applicable law; and the administrative costs reasonably
necessary and related to these costs.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
3. Local retail sales and
use tax increment revenue, or any portion thereof, may be applied as follows:

(1) To pay downtown or
neighborhood commercial district community revitalization costs;

(2) To pay into bond
redemption funds established to pay the principal and interest on general
obligation or revenue bonds issued to finance a downtown or neighborhood
commercial district community revitalization project;

(3) In combination with
any other public or private funds available to the city or town for the
purposes provided in this section; or

(4) To pay any
combination of costs under subsection (1), (2), or (3) of this section.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
4. (1) The legislative
authority of a city or town may authorize the use of local sales and use tax
increment revenue for any purpose authorized in this chapter within the
boundaries of a downtown or one or more neighborhood commercial districts.

(2) Prior to
authorizing the use of local sales and use tax increment revenue, the
legislative authority must designate the boundaries of each downtown or
neighborhood commercial district.

(3) The legislative
authority of a city or town may choose to pool the local sales and use tax
increment revenue collected in the various downtown and neighborhood commercial
districts within the city or town for the purposes authorized in this chapter.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
5. A city or town shall determine
at its own cost the amount of local sales and use tax increment revenue that
may be generated in the downtown and neighborhood commercial districts it
designates. The department of revenue may, at its discretion, provide advice
or other assistance to cities and towns to assist in determining local sales
and use tax increment revenue.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
6. If any provision of this
act or its application to any person or circumstance is held invalid, the
remainder of the act or the application of the provision to other persons or
circumstances is not affected.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 7. Sections 1 through 6 of
this act constitute a new chapter in Title 35 RCW.

---
END ---