BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF
WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1. RCW 28A.600.300 and 1994
c 205 s 1 are each amended to read as follows:

For the purposes of RCW
28A.600.310 through 28A.600.400, "participating institution of higher
education" or "institution of higher education" means:

(1) A community or
technical college as defined in RCW 28B.50.030; and

(2)
Central Washington University, Eastern Washington University, ((and))
Washington State University, and The Evergreen State College, if the
institution's governing board decides to participate in the program in RCW
28A.600.310 through 28A.600.400.

--- END ---