BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF
WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec.
1. (1) It is the intent of
the legislature to encourage congruency among energy policy, technology policy,
and economic development policy in order to better serve the citizens of
Washington and to improve the economic climate and opportunities throughout the
state. This includes policies that support the deployment of current and
emerging technologies.

(2) It is further the
intent of the legislature that energy and telecommunications regulation reflect
a less costly regulatory process that can ultimately benefit the consumer,
eliminate duplication of functions, and improve government efficiency.

(3) It is further the
intent of the legislature that the state continue to support policies that
produce affordable energy.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
2. (1) A work group is
established to develop a restructuring plan to transfer functions currently
performed by the utilities and transportation commission to other appropriate
existing agencies. The work group will be composed of at least the following
state agency representatives:

(a) The director of the
office of financial management;

(b) The secretary of
the department of health;

(c) The director of the
department of community, trade, and economic development;

(d) The secretary of
the department of transportation; and

(e) The director of the
utilities and transportation commission.

(2) The work group must
keep the following legislative members informed of their deliberations through
regular communication:

(a) The chair and
ranking minority member of the senate economic development and
telecommunications committee and the senate environment, energy, and water
committee; and

(b) The chair and
ranking minority member of the house of representatives technology,
telecommunications, and energy committee.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
3. (1) The work group must
develop a restructuring plan to transfer those functions of the utilities and
transportation commission that it determines appropriate to existing agencies.
The goals of a restructuring plan are to:

(a) Enhance the ability
to coordinate energy, telecommunications, and economic development policy;

(b) Eliminate duplicate
functions;

(c) Minimize costs of
transition; and

(d) Reduce the number
of full-time equivalent staff that transfer to an agency from the utilities and
transportation commission by ten percent.

(2) In addition to an
examination of functions performed by the utilities and transportation
commission, the work group must recommend a restructuring plan that considers
the following transfers:

(a) The regulation of
energy, gas, and telecommunications functions to the department of community,
trade, and economic development;

(b) The regulation of
water companies functions to the department of health;

(c) Common carrier
functions to the department of transportation;

(d) Solid waste,
low-level radioactive waste disposal functions to the department of ecology;
and

(e) The functions
relating to securities and transfers of property by utilities to the attorney
general.

(3) The completed
restructuring plan must be submitted to the governor and the appropriate
standing committees of the legislature by November 1, 2002.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
4. (1) The work group must
also examine the rate-making process and determine whether efficiencies and
reduced costs to participants in the process can be gained in updating
procedures and process deadlines. In addition, the work group must examine the
role of the commissioners and administrative law judges to determine whether
efficiencies and cost savings can be made.

(2) The work group must
consider whether consolidating the operation of the regulatory functions with
operation of the energy policy division of the department of community, trade,
and economic development can result in efficiencies or savings.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 5. This act expires July 1,
2003.

---
END ---