BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF
WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec.
1. The legislature finds
that:

(1) Infrastructure for
distributing, transmitting, storing, and generating energy is crucial to the
delivery of safe, reliable, and efficient energy service. The health, safety,
and welfare of the citizens of the state and the vitality of its economy depend
upon such infrastructure.

(2) Public service
companies must make large and continuing investments in their infrastructure to
meet the demands of a growing population, support economic development, and
maintain and improve system reliability and security.

(3) Changes in federal
energy policy during the past decade have fostered the development of a
national wholesale energy market. This market has changed traditional
wholesale energy relationships and made it necessary to update state law to
allow more rapid regulatory response to changing wholesale market conditions.

(4) The interests of
utility customers and utility investors are served by a financially sound and
stable utility industry that is able to attract needed investment capital.
Neither interest is served by an industry on the borderline of economic
viability and creditworthiness.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
2. A new section is added
to chapter 80.28 RCW to read as follows:

(1) Every gas or
electrical company that purchases natural gas, fuel, or electric power to
provide natural gas or electric power to the public may recover through its
rates the actual costs of natural gas, fuel, and electric power using a purchased
gas adjustment or power cost adjustment process. The purchased gas adjustment
or power cost adjustment process must be included in its tariff.

(2)(a) An electrical
company that recovers its actual costs of fuel or electric power through its
rates under subsection (1) of this section must use deferred accounting by
recording upon its books and records in deferred accounts all increases and
decreases in costs for fuel and electric power that differ from the projected
costs.

(b) An electrical
company must file sufficient information as determined by the commission to
allow the commission to verify the numerical calculations necessary to clear
the deferred accounts.

(c) An electrical
company using a power cost adjustment process must file monthly reports of
deferred accounts activity and entries.

(d) An electrical
company using deferred accounting shall file an application with the commission
to clear its deferred accounts at least annually and may not file an
application more often than quarterly in a twelve-month period. An electrical
company must have used deferred accounting for six months before filing its
first application.

(3) If the net increase
or decrease in fuel and electric power costs necessary to clear its deferred
accounts for the period requested is more than fifteen percent of the projected
costs for the six-month period before the period in which application is made,
the electrical company's rate will be adjusted by a percentage equal to the
percentage increase above or decrease below fifteen percent. The rate
adjustment takes effect on the first day following the period in which the
application is made.

(4) For purposes of
this section, "actual costs" means all costs that are incurred by an
electrical company subject to the jurisdiction of the commission and that are
required to purchase fuel, capacity, and energy.

(5) The
commission must adopt rules to implement this section by December 31, 2002.

---
END ---