BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF
WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec.
1. The office of the
insurance commissioner shall conduct a study on the availability and
affordability of liability insurance for adult family homes, boarding homes,
nursing homes, and assisted living facilities. The study shall include a
review of self-insurance as an alternative for affected residential care
providers.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
2. The office of the
insurance commissioner shall conduct a study of long-term care insurance
coverage for residential care services for individuals requiring long-term
care.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 3. There is appropriated
from the insurance commissioner's regulatory account to the office of the
insurance commissioner, on the effective date of this act, the amount of three
hundred thousand dollars, or as much thereof as may be necessary, for the
purposes of this act.

---
END ---