BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF
WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec.
1. A new section is added
to chapter 43.20 RCW to read as follows:

For any new or revised
water or sewer general comprehensive plan submitted by a city, town, public
utility district, or water-sewer district for review under this chapter, the
department shall review and either approve, conditionally approve, reject, or request
amendments within ninety days of the receipt of the submission of the plan.
The department may extend this ninety-day time limitation for new submittals by
up to an additional ninety days if insufficient time exists to adequately
review the general comprehensive plan. For rejections of plans or extensions
of the timeline, the department shall provide in writing to the city, town,
public utility district, or water-sewer district the reason for such action.
In addition, the governing body of the city, town, public utility district, or
water-sewer district and the department may mutually agree to an extension of
the deadlines contained in this section.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
2. A new section is added
to chapter 90.48 RCW to read as follows:

For any new or revised
sewer general comprehensive plan submitted by a city, town, public utility
district, or water-sewer district for review under this chapter, the department
shall review and either approve, conditionally approve, reject, or request
amendments within ninety days of the receipt of the submission of the plan.
The department may extend this ninety-day time limitation for new submittals by
up to an additional ninety days if insufficient time exists to adequately
review the general comprehensive plan. For rejections of plans or extensions
of the timeline, the department shall provide in writing to the city, town,
public utility district, or water-sewer district the reason for such action.
In addition, the governing body of the city, town, public utility district, or
water-sewer district and the department may mutually agree to an extension of
the deadlines contained in this section.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
3. A new section is added
to chapter 70.116 RCW to read as follows:

For any
new or revised water or sewer general comprehensive plan submitted by a city,
town, public utility district, or water-sewer district for review under this
chapter, the department of health shall review and either approve,
conditionally approve, reject, or request amendments within ninety days of the
receipt of the submission of the plan. The department of health may extend
this ninety-day time limitation for new submittals by up to an additional
ninety days if insufficient time exists to adequately review the general
comprehensive plan. For rejections of plans or extensions of the timeline, the
department shall provide in writing to the city, town, public utility district,
or water-sewer district the reason for such action. In addition, the governing
body of the city, town, public utility district, or water-sewer district and
the department of health may mutually agree to an extension of the deadlines
contained in this section.

---
END ---