BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF
WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1. RCW 28A.235.120 and 1997
c 13 s 4 are each amended to read as follows:

The
directors of any school district may establish, equip and operate ((lunchrooms))
meal programs in school buildings for pupils((,));
certificated and classified employees((,)); volunteers; public
agencies, political subdivisions, or associations that serve public entities
while using school facilities; other local, state, or federal child nutrition
programs; and for school or employee functions: PROVIDED, That the
expenditures for food supplies shall not exceed the estimated revenues from the
sale of ((lunches)) meals, federal ((lunch)) aid, Indian
education fund lunch aid, or other anticipated revenue, including donations, to
be received for that purpose: PROVIDED FURTHER, That the directors of any
school district may provide for the use of kitchens and lunchrooms or other
facilities in school buildings to furnish meals to elderly persons at cost as
provided in RCW 28A.623.020: PROVIDED, FURTHER, That the directors of any school
district may provide for the use of kitchens and lunchrooms or other facilities
in school buildings to furnish meals at cost as provided in RCW 28A.623.030 to
children who are participating in educational or training or care programs or
activities conducted by private, nonprofit organizations and entities and to
students who are attending private elementary and secondary schools. Operation
for the purposes of this section shall include the employment and discharge for
sufficient cause of personnel necessary for preparation of food or supervision
of students during lunch periods and fixing their compensation, payable from
the district general fund, or entering into agreement with a private agency for
the establishment, management and/or operation of a food service program or any
part thereof.

--- END ---