BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF
WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec.
1. In order to provide funds
necessary for the location, design, right of way, and construction of highway
improvements, and in order to provide funds necessary for vessel and terminal
acquisition, construction, and improvements, there will be issued and sold upon
the request of the transportation commission, a total of five billion five
hundred million dollars of general obligation bonds of the state of Washington
for highway improvement projects.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
2. Upon the request of the
transportation commission, the state finance committee will supervise and
provide for the issuance, sale, and retirement of the bonds authorized by
sections 1 through 6 of this act in accordance with chapter 39.42 RCW. Bonds
authorized by sections 1 through 6 of this act will be sold in a manner, at a
time or times, in amounts, and at prices as the state finance committee will
determine. No bonds may be offered for sale without prior legislative
appropriation of the net proceeds of the sale of the bonds.

The state finance
committee will consider the issuance of short-term obligations in lieu of
long-term obligations for the purposes of more favorable interest rates, lower
total interest costs, and increased marketability, and for the purpose of
retiring the bonds during the life of the project for which they were issued.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
3. The proceeds from the
sale of bonds authorized by sections 1 through 6 of this act will be deposited
in the motor vehicle fund. These proceeds will be available only for the
purposes enumerated in section 1 of this act, for the payment of bond
anticipation notes, if any, and for the payment of bond issuance costs,
including the costs of underwriting.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
4. Bonds issued under the
authority of sections 1 through 6 of this act will distinctly state that they
are a general obligation of the state of Washington, will pledge the full faith
and credit of the state to the payment of the principal and interest, and will
contain an unconditional promise to pay principal and interest as they become
due. The principal and interest on the bonds will be first payable in the
manner provided in sections 1 through 6 of this act from the proceeds of the
state excise taxes on motor vehicle and special fuel imposed in chapters 82.36
and 82.38 RCW. Proceeds of these excise taxes are hereby pledged to the
payment of any bonds and the interest thereon issued under sections 1 through 6
of this act, and the legislature agrees to continue to impose these excise
taxes on motor vehicle and special fuel in amounts sufficient to pay, when due,
the principal and interest on all bonds issued under the authority of sections
1 through 6 of this act.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
5. Both principal and
interest on the bonds issued for the purposes of sections 1 through 6 of this
act will be payable from the highway bond retirement fund. The state finance
committee may provide that a special account be created in the fund to
facilitate payment of the principal and interest. The state finance committee
will, on or before June 30th of each year, certify to the state treasurer the
amount required for principal and interest on the bonds in accordance with the
bond proceedings. The state treasurer will withdraw revenues from the motor
vehicle fund and deposit in the highway bond retirement fund, or a special
account in the fund, any amounts, and at such times, as required by the bond
proceedings.

Any funds required for
bond retirement or interest on the bonds authorized by sections 1 through 6 of
this act will be taken from that portion of the motor vehicle fund that results
from the imposition of excise taxes on motor vehicle and special fuel and which
is, or may be appropriated to the department of transportation for state
highway purposes. Funds required will never constitute a charge against any
other allocations of motor vehicle fuel and special fuel tax revenues to the
state, counties, cities, and towns unless the amount arising from excise taxes
on motor vehicle and special fuel distributed to the state in the motor vehicle
fund proves insufficient to meet the requirements for bond retirement or
interest on any bonds.

Any payments for bond
retirement or interest on the bonds taken from other revenues from the motor
vehicle fuel or special fuel taxes that are distributed to the state, counties,
cities, and towns will be repaid from the first revenues from the motor vehicle
fuel or special fuel taxes distributed to the motor vehicle fund not required
for bond retirement or interest on the bonds.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
6. Bonds issued under
sections 1 through 5 of this act and this section and any other general
obligation bonds of the state of Washington that have been or that may be
authorized and that pledge motor vehicle and special fuel excise taxes for the
payment of principal and interest thereon will be an equal charge against the
revenues from the motor vehicle and special fuel excise taxes.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
7. Sections 1 through 6 of
this act are each added to chapter 47.10 RCW.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 8. If any provision of this
act or its application to any person or circumstance is held invalid, the
remainder of the act or the application of the provision to other persons or
circumstances is not affected.

---
END ---