BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF
WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1. RCW 53.29.010 and 1989 c
425 s 5 are each amended to read as follows:

It is declared to be
the finding of the legislature of the state of Washington that:

(1) The servicing
functions and activities connected with the oceanborne and overseas airborne
trade and commerce of port districts, including customs clearance, shipping
negotiations, cargo routing, freight forwarding, financing, insurance
arrangements and other similar transactions which are presently performed in
various, scattered physical and electronic locations in the districts
should be centralized to provide for more efficient and economical
transportation of persons and more efficient and economical physical or
electronic facilities and services for the exchange and buying,
selling and transportation of commodities and other property in world trade and
commerce;

(2) Unification, at a
single, centrally located physical or electronic site of a facility of
commerce, i.e., a trade center, accommodating the functions and activities
described in subsection (1) of this section and the appropriate governmental,
administrative and other services connected with or incidental to
transportation and security of persons and property and the promotion
and protection of port commerce, and providing a central locale for exhibiting,
and otherwise promoting the exchange and buying and selling of commodities and
property in world trade and commerce, will materially assist in preserving the
material and other benefits of a prosperous port community;

(3) The undertaking of
the aforesaid unified trade center project by a port district or the Washington
public ports association has the single object of preserving, and will aid in
the promotion, security, and preservation of, the economic well-being of
port districts and the state of Washington and is found and determined to be a
public purpose.

Sec. 2. RCW 53.29.020 and 1989 c
425 s 6 are each amended to read as follows:

In addition to all
other powers granted to port districts, any such district, the Washington
public ports association, or the federation of Washington ports as described in
RCW 53.06.070 may acquire, as provided for other port properties in RCW
53.08.010, construct, develop, operate and maintain all land or other property
interests, buildings, structures or other improvements, and may participate
in transactions necessary to provide, electronically or otherwise,
facilities or to exercise powers or purposes of a trade center including
but not limited to the following electronic or physical facilities:

(1) A facility
consisting of one or more structures, improvements and areas for the
centralized accommodation of public and private agencies, persons and
facilities in order to afford improved service to waterborne and airborne
import and export trade and commerce;

(2) Facilities for the
promotion of such import and export trade and commerce, inspection, testing,
display and appraisal facilities, foreign trade zones, terminal and
transportation facilities, office meeting rooms, auditoriums, libraries,
language translation services, storage, warehouse, marketing and exhibition
facilities, facilities for federal, state, county and other municipal and
governmental agencies providing services relating to the foregoing and
including, but not being limited to, customs houses and customs stores, and
other incidental facilities and accommodations.

Sec. 3. RCW 53.29.030 and 1989 c
425 s 7 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) In carrying out the
powers authorized by this chapter and chapter 53.06 RCW, port districts and the
Washington public ports association are authorized to cooperate ((and)),
act, and invest jointly with other public and private agencies and
persons, including, but not limited to, the federal government, the
state, other ports and municipal corporations, other states and their political
subdivisions, and private nonprofit trade promotion groups and associate
development organizations.

(2) Port districts
operating trade center buildings or operating association or federation trade
centers, shall pay an annual service fee to the county treasurer wherein the
center is located for municipal services rendered to the trade center
building. The measure of such service fee shall be equal to three percent of
the gross rentals received from the nongovernmental tenants of such trade
center building. Such proceeds shall be distributed by the county treasurer as
follows: Forty percent to the school district, forty percent to the city, and
twenty percent to the county wherein the center is located: PROVIDED, That if
the center is located in an unincorporated area, twenty percent shall be
allocated to the fire district, forty percent to the school district, and forty
percent to the county.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
4. A new section is added
to chapter 53.29 RCW to read as follows:

The definitions in this
section apply throughout RCW 53.29.020 and 53.29.030 unless the context clearly
requires otherwise.

(1) "Person"
has the same meaning as defined in the electronic signatures in global and
national commerce act (15 U.S.C. Sec. 7006 (8)) in effect on the effective date
of this section.

(2)
"Transaction" has the same meaning as defined in the electronic
signatures in global and national commerce act (15 U.S.C. Sec. 7006 (13)) in
effect on the effective date of this section. However, "transaction"
also includes actions relating to governmental affairs.

---
END ---