BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF
WASHINGTON:

2001-03 BIENNIUM

GENERAL GOVERNMENT AGENCIES-‑OPERATING

Sec. 101. 2001 2nd sp.s. c 14 s
102 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:

FOR THE LEGISLATIVE EVALUATION
AND ACCOUNTABILITY PROGRAM

Motor Vehicle Account‑-State
Appropriation.......... $ ((1,676,000))

488,000

((The
appropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and
limitations and specified amounts are provided solely for that activity:
$1,188,000 of the motor vehicle account‑-state appropriation is provided
for the implementation of House Bill No. 2269 in the form enacted by the
legislature. If House Bill No. 2269 is not enacted in the form passed by the
legislature by July 31, 2001, this funding will lapse.))

(End of
part)

TRANSPORTATION AGENCIES

Sec. 201. 2001 2nd sp.s. c 14 s
201 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:

FOR THE WASHINGTON TRAFFIC
SAFETY COMMISSION

Highway Safety Account‑-State
Appropriation.... $ ((1,638,000))

1,637,000

Highway Safety Account‑-Federal
Appropriation... $........................................... ((5,671,000))

5,666,000

School Zone Safety Account‑-State
Appropriation $ 1,504,000

TOTAL
APPROPRIATION................. $ ((8,813,000))

8,807,000

The appropriations in
this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations and
specified amounts are provided solely for that activity: The Washington
traffic safety commission may oversee no more than four pilot projects
implementing the use of traffic safety cameras at school zones, railroad
crossings, construction zones or stoplights, and no more than one pilot project
regarding the use of traffic safety cameras in residential neighborhoods, at
school zones, railroad crossings, construction zones, or stoplights.

(1) In order to ensure
adequate time in the 2001-03 biennium to evaluate the effectiveness of the
pilot program, any programs authorized by the commission must be authorized by
December 31, 2001.

(2) If the state, a
county, or a city has established an authorized traffic safety camera pilot
program under this section, the compensation paid to the manufacturer or vendor
of the equipment used: Must be based upon the value of the equipment and
services provided or rendered in support of the system; and may not be based
upon a portion of the fine or civil penalty imposed or the revenue generated by
the equipment.

(3) The traffic safety
commission shall use the following guidelines to administer the program:

(a) Traffic safety cameras
may take pictures of the vehicle and vehicle license plate only;

(b) The law enforcement
agency of the city or county government shall plainly mark the locations where
the automated traffic enforcement system is used by placing signs on street
locations that clearly indicate to a driver that he or she is entering a zone
where traffic laws are enforced by an automated traffic enforcement system;

(c) Cities and counties
using traffic safety cameras must provide periodic notice by mail to its
citizens indicating the zones in which the traffic safety cameras will be used;

(d) Notices of
infractions must be mailed to the registered owner of a vehicle within fourteen
days of the infraction occurring;

(e) The owner of the
vehicle is not responsible for the violation if the owner of the vehicle,
within fifteen days after notification of the violation, furnishes the
officials or agents of the municipality that issued the citation with:

(i) An affidavit made
under oath, stating that the vehicle involved was, at the time, stolen or in
the care, custody, or control of some person other than the registered owner;
or

(ii) Testimony in open
court under oath that the person was not the operator of the vehicle at the
time of the alleged violation;

(f) Infractions detected
through the use of traffic safety cameras are not part of the registered
owner's driving record under RCW 46.52.101 and 46.52.120; and

(g) By January 1, 2003,
the traffic safety commission shall provide a report to the legislature
regarding the use, public acceptance, outcomes, and other relevant issues
regarding traffic safety cameras demonstrated by the pilot projects.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
202. A new section is added
to 2001 2nd sp.s. c 14 (uncodified) to read as follows:

FOR THE COUNTY ROAD
ADMINISTRATION BOARD‑-OPERATING PROGRAM

Rural Arterial Trust
Account‑-State

Appropriation.............................. $ 741,000

Motor Vehicle Account‑-State
Appropriation..... $ 1,886,000

County Arterial
Preservation Account‑-

State Appropriation........................ $ 700,000

TOTAL
APPROPRIATION................. $ 3,327,000

Sec. 203. 2001 2nd sp.s. c 14 s
203 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:

FOR THE COUNTY ROAD
ADMINISTRATION BOARD‑-CAPITAL PROGRAM

Rural Arterial Trust
Account‑-State

Appropriation.............................. $ ((50,182,000))

56,965,000

Motor Vehicle Account‑-State
Appropriation..... $ ((1,887,000))

368,000

County Arterial
Preservation Account‑-

State Appropriation........................ $ ((28,551,000))

28,681,000

TOTAL
APPROPRIATION................. $ ((80,620,000))

86,014,000

The appropriations in
this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations and
specified amounts are provided solely for that activity:

((It is the intent
of the legislature that the county road administration board receive separate
programmatic appropriations for the operating program and the capital program
for the 2001-03 biennium, and thereafter. Agency administrative costs may not
be charged against projects or funded from the capital program appropriations.

(1) $1,540,000 of
the motor vehicle account‑‑state appropriation, $870,000 of the
county arterial preservation account‑‑state appropriation, and
$917,000 of the rural arterial trust account‑‑state appropriation
are provided for the operations program. Of the motor vehicle account‑-state
appropriation, $368,000 is provided for county ferries as set forth in RCW
47.56.724(4).

(2) $347,000 of the
motor vehicle account‑‑state appropriation, $27,681,000 of the
county arterial preservation account‑‑state appropriation, and
$49,265,000 of the rural arterial trust account‑‑state
appropriation are provided for the capital program.)) $368,000 of the motor vehicle account‑-state
appropriation is provided for county ferries as set forth in RCW 47.56.724(4).

NEW SECTION. Sec.
204. A new section is added
to 2001 2nd sp.s. c 14 (uncodified) to read as follows:

FOR THE TRANSPORTATION
IMPROVEMENT BOARD‑-OPERATING PROGRAM

Urban Arterial Trust
Account‑-State

Appropriation.............................. $ 1,552,000

Transportation Improvement
Account‑-

State Appropriation........................ $ 1,551,000

TOTAL
APPROPRIATION................. $ 3,103,000

Sec. 205. 2001 2nd sp.s. c 14 s
204 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:

FOR THE TRANSPORTATION
IMPROVEMENT BOARD‑-CAPITAL PROGRAM

Urban Arterial Trust
Account‑-State

Appropriation.............................. $ ((94,690,000))

105,622,000

Transportation Improvement
Account‑-

State Appropriation........................ $ ((118,605,000))

130,456,000

TOTAL
APPROPRIATION................. $ ((213,295,000))

236,078,000

The appropriations in
this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations and
specified amounts are provided solely for that activity:

((It is the intent
of the legislature that the transportation improvement board receive separate
programmatic appropriations for the operating program and the capital program
for the 2001-03 biennium, and thereafter. Agency administrative costs may not
be charged against projects or funded from the capital program appropriations.

(1) $1,551,000 of
the transportation improvement account‑‑state appropriation and
$1,552,000 of the urban arterial trust account‑‑state appropriation
are provided for the operations program.

(2) $117,054,000 of
the transportation improvement account‑‑state appropriation and
$93,138,000 of the urban arterial trust account‑‑state
appropriation are provided for the capital program.

(3))) The transportation improvement account‑-state
appropriation includes (($47,325,000)) $34,030,000 in proceeds
from the sale of bonds authorized in RCW 47.26.500. The transportation
improvement board may authorize the use of current revenues available to the
agency in-lieu of bond proceeds for any part of the state appropriation.

Sec. 206. 2001 2nd sp.s. c 14 s
205 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:

FOR THE LEGISLATIVE
TRANSPORTATION COMMITTEE

Motor Vehicle
Account--State Appropriation..... $ ((3,596,000))

3,895,000

The appropriation in
this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations and
specified amounts are provided solely for that activity:

(1) $2,823,000 of the
motor vehicle account--state appropriation is provided for the operation of the
house of representatives transportation committee.

(2) To the extent
possible, this appropriation shall utilize funds allocated under RCW
46.68.110(2).

(3) The house of
representatives transportation committee shall conduct a study of the use of
motorized scooters. The study shall, at a minimum, identify and analyze the
safety issues associated with use of motorized scooters, including use by
children, commuters, and the disabled. House of representatives
transportation committee cochairs shall each appoint one member from their
respective caucus to serve as cochair of the study group. The chair of the
senate transportation committee may also appoint two members from the senate
transportation committee, one from each caucus, to participate in the study.
The study shall be staffed by house of representatives transportation committee
staff. The study group shall report back to the house of representatives
transportation committee by January 1, 2002.

(4) The house of
representatives transportation committee shall conduct a study of the effect of
the weight of fire-fighting apparatus on state roadways. The study shall
determine, at a minimum, the various types of fire-fighting apparatus currently
in use on state roadways; the size, weight and load effect of fire-fighting
apparatus that are currently in use or that potentially could be in use on the
state roadways, as well as on state bridges; and the effect on public safety.
The study may examine state and federal laws that affect fire-fighting
apparatuses. House of representatives transportation committee cochairs shall
each appoint one member from their respective caucus to serve as cochair of the
study group. The study shall be staffed by house of representatives
transportation committee staff. The study group will report back to the house
of representatives transportation committee by January 1, 2002.

(5) The legislative
transportation committee shall conduct a feasibility study of potential for
economic partnerships between the Washington state ferries and local government
entities, including but not limited to port districts. The study is intended
to improve ferry terminals. The study shall, at a minimum, identify the
market, physical, and economic factors that should be examined in determining
whether an economic or commercial development partnership project on or around
Washington state ferry terminals is likely to produce revenue for the partners.
The study shall apply those factors to an analysis of each terminal used by
Washington state ferries and recommend whether further exploration of state and
local partnerships would be of potential economic benefit to the partners. The
entity selected to perform the study through the request for proposals process
will report back to the transportation committees of the legislature by
December 1, 2001.

(6) The legislative
transportation committee, in cooperation with an areawide transportation system
or systems, shall undertake an evaluation of providing locally sponsored
transit services in a local community supplemental to those services provided
by an areawide system. The evaluation shall address:

(a) The costs and
benefits of providing such services;

(b) The impact of such
service on ridership on the areawide system and on any regional systems;

(c) Funding options for
supplemental services; and

(d) Institutional
arrangements affecting the institution of supplemental services.

The committee shall
work with the department of transportation, areawide transit providers,
community officials, private businesses, labor organizations, and others as
appropriate in conducting the evaluation, and in developing a pilot project if
feasible. The committee shall provide an interim progress report to the
legislature by January 2002. The committee shall report its findings to the
legislature not later than December 1, 2002.

(7) The legislative
transportation committee shall undertake an evaluation of the statutory
exemptions for transportation taxes, including but not limited to motor vehicle
fuel taxes. The committee shall report its findings to the legislature by
December 1, 2002.

(8) The legislative
transportation committee will convene a working group to review the costs,
processes, and other considerations relating to special vehicle license
plates. The working group will also review special license plate tabs and
emblems. The committee will report its findings to the legislature by December
1, 2002.

(9) $300,000 of the
motor vehicle account‑-state appropriation is provided solely for a study
of private-public partnerships in transportation. The department of
transportation shall provide staff support to a legislative oversight committee
that will manage a study of public-private partnerships in transportation. The
legislative oversight committee will consist of three members from each caucus
in each house of the legislature, appointed by the leadership of the
legislators' respective caucus. The legislative oversight committee shall
analyze and make recommendations on: (a) The barriers that prevent the private
sector from providing transportation services, which could include ferry, bus,
or monorail; (b) the use of public-private partnerships nationally and the
experiences of other states in using public-private partnerships; (c) the
public-private opportunities for transportation projects in Washington; and (d)
the advantages and disadvantages of the financing options available for
public-private partnerships. The legislative oversight committee shall report
its findings and recommendations to the legislature by December 1, 2003.

(10) The legislative
transportation committee shall form a working group to evaluate the feasibility
of developing an alternative corridor to Interstate 5 and Interstate 405 to
expedite the movement of commerce between the Canadian border, the central
Puget Sound region, the south Puget Sound region, and more southerly areas.
The corridor would run from approximately the Canadian border in the north to
approximately Lewis county in the south. This alternative corridor analysis
shall address truck, rail, pipeline, and other utility needs for the corridor,
to determine the feasibility of financing and constructing such a corridor,
taking into consideration: (a) Anticipated present and future freight demand
as well as freight traffic relief for existing state highway and rail routes;
(b) the potential for carrying general purpose traffic to provide relief for
other state highway routes; (c) a cost-benefit analysis detailing various
funding possibilities, including federal funds and the use of charges and tolls
to fund construction and operation of the corridor as a utility corridor and a
toll facility; (d) an analysis detailing possible right of way locations,
including but not limited to property donations, trades, or credits between or
among the public and private sector; and (e) possible private sector, local, or
other partnerships that may be used to fund the project.

The working group
shall report its findings to the full committee by December 15, 2002.

Sec. 207. 2001 2nd sp.s. c 14 s
206 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:

FOR THE MARINE EMPLOYEES COMMISSION

Puget Sound Ferry
Operations Account‑-

State Appropriation........................ $ ((332,000))

331,000

Sec. 208. 2001 2nd sp.s. c 14 s
202 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:

FOR THE BOARD OF PILOTAGE
COMMISSIONERS

Pilotage Account‑-State
Appropriation.......... $ ((305,000))

300,000

Sec. 209. 2001 2nd sp.s. c 14 s
207 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:

FOR THE TRANSPORTATION
COMMISSION

Motor Vehicle Account‑-State
Appropriation..... $ 773,000

The appropriation in
this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations: The
commission shall exercise its authority to commence proceedings to name state
route No. 99 the William P. Stewart Memorial Highway.

Sec. 210. 2001 2nd sp.s. c 14 s
209 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:

FOR THE WASHINGTON STATE
PATROL‑-FIELD OPERATIONS BUREAU

State Patrol Highway
Account‑-

State Appropriation........................ $ ((162,081,000))

164,147,000

State Patrol Highway
Account‑-

Federal Appropriation...................... $ ((7,084,000))

7,278,000

State Patrol Highway
Account‑-

Private/Local
Appropriation................ $ 169,000

TOTAL
APPROPRIATION................. $ ((169,334,000))

171,594,000

The appropriations in
this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations and
specified amounts are provided solely for the activities of the field
operations bureau:

(1) As a result of the
elimination of the vehicle inspection number (VIN) program, no permanent
Washington state patrol employee shall be displaced from employment without the
opportunity to fill a vacant patrol position for which he or she has a preference
and meets the minimum qualifications. For the purpose of the VIN program
elimination, the guidelines under chapter 356-26 WAC (Registers-Certifications)
shall be suspended for those employees holding the classification of VIN 1 or
2.

(2) To the extent possible,
the agency shall transfer displaced VIN personnel into the 20 newly created
school bus inspection and motor carrier safety assistance program positions.
The agency shall fill existing vacant positions within the commercial vehicle
division with displaced VIN personnel. The agency shall report by December 31,
2001, to the senate and house of representatives transportation committees on
efforts to relocate displaced VIN personnel.

(3) The Washington
state patrol shall contract with an independent consulting firm to develop a
cost allocation system to identify which agency activities qualify as a
"highway purpose" under Article II, section 40 of the state
Constitution. The consulting firm shall present findings and recommendations
to the legislative transportation committee during the 2002 legislative
interim. The legislative transportation committee shall approve or reject
those findings and recommendations.

(4) The final cost
allocation system and processes must be utilized to develop the Washington
state patrol's request budget for 2003-05.

Sec. 211. 2001 2nd sp.s. c 14 s
210 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:

FOR THE WASHINGTON STATE
PATROL‑-SUPPORT SERVICES BUREAU

Multimodal
Transportation Account‑-State

Appropriation.............................. $ 5,247,000

State Patrol Highway
Account‑-

State Appropriation........................ $ ((69,960,000))

72,191,000

State Patrol Highway
Account‑-

Private/Local
Appropriation................ $ 735,000

TOTAL
APPROPRIATION................. $ ((70,695,000))

78,173,000

The appropriations in
this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations and
specified amounts are provided solely for the activities of the support
services bureau:

(1) $67,000 of the
state patrol highway account‑-state appropriation is provided solely for
the patrol to work jointly with the department of transportation, the military
department, and the department of natural resources, in coordination with the
state interoperability executive committee, on the development and
implementation of a secure geographical information system database to
illustrate locations and specifications of statewide radio and microwave towers

(2) $5,247,000 of
the multimodal transportation account‑-state appropriation and $2,299,000
of the state patrol highway account‑-state appropriation is a one time
funding of general fund activities. The general fund will resume funding these
activities beginning in the 2003-05 biennium.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
212. A new section is added
to 2001 2nd sp.s. c 14 (uncodified) to read as follows:

FOR THE WASHINGTON STATE
PATROL‑-INVESTIGATIVE SERVICES
BUREAU

Multimodal Transportation
Account‑-State

Appropriation.............................. $ 5,088,000

The appropriation in
this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations and
specified amounts are provided solely for the activities referenced:
$5,088,000 of the multimodal transportation account‑-state appropriation
is a one time funding of general fund activities. The general fund will resume
funding these activities beginning in the 2003-05 biennium.

Sec. 213. 2001 2nd sp.s. c 14 s
211 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:

FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF
LICENSING‑-MANAGEMENT AND SUPPORT
SERVICES

Marine Fuel Tax Refund
Account‑-State

Appropriation...................... ........ $ ((7,000))

3,000

Motorcycle Safety Education
Account‑-

State Appropriation........................ $ ((114,000))

88,000

Wildlife Account‑-State
Appropriation.......... $ ((89,000))

81,000

Highway Safety Account‑-State
Appropriation.... $ ((7,740,000))

7,599,000

Highway Safety Account‑-Federal
Appropriation... $ 55,000

Motor Vehicle Account‑-State
Appropriation..... $ ((4,230,000))

4,400,000

Licensing Services Account‑-State

Appropriation.............................. $ ((123,000))

163,000

TOTAL
APPROPRIATION................. $ ((12,303,000))

12,389,000

The appropriations
in this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations and
specified amounts are provided solely for the activities referenced:

(1) $6,000 of the
motor vehicle account‑-state appropriation is provided solely for the
implementation of Senate Bill No. 5354 in the form passed by the legislature.
If Senate Bill No. 5354 is not enacted in the form passed by the legislature
the amount provided in this subsection shall lapse.

(2) $14,000 of the
motor vehicle account‑-state appropriation and $3,000 of the highway
safety account‑‑state appropriation are provided solely for the
implementation of Senate Bill No. 6814 in the form passed by the legislature.
If Senate Bill No. 6814 is not enacted in the form passed by the legislature the
amounts provided in this subsection shall lapse.

(3) $38,000 of the
motor vehicle account‑‑state appropriation is provided solely for
the implementation of Senate Bill No. 6494 in the form passed by the
legislature. If Senate Bill No. 6494 is not enacted in the form passed by the
legislature the amount provided in this subsection shall lapse.

(4) $41,000 of the
motor vehicle account‑-state appropriation is provided solely for the
implementation of House Bill No. 2753 in the form passed by the legislature.
If House Bill No. 2753 is not enacted in the form passed by the legislature the
amount provided in this subsection shall lapse.

(5) $26,000 of the
highway safety account‑-state appropriation is provided solely for the
implementation of Senate Bill No. 6748 in the form passed by the legislature.
If Senate Bill No. 6748 is not enacted in the form passed by the legislature
the amount provided in this subsection shall lapse.

Sec. 214. 2001 2nd sp.s. c 14 s
212 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:

FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF
LICENSING‑-INFORMATION SYSTEMS

Marine Fuel Tax Refund
Account‑-State

Appropriation.............................. $ 2,000

Motorcycle Safety Education
Account‑-

State Appropriation........................ $ ((50,000))

13,000

Wildlife Account‑-State
Appropriation.......... $ 34,000

Highway Safety Account‑-State
Appropriation.... $ ((5,655,000))

5,746,000

Highway Safety Account‑-Federal
Appropriation... $ 31,000

Motor Vehicle Account‑-State
Appropriation..... $ ((3,304,000))

3,734,000

Licensing Services Account‑-State

Appropriation.............................. $ ((292,000))

209,000

TOTAL
APPROPRIATION................. $ ((9,337,000))

9,769,000

The appropriations in
this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations:

(1) The
department of licensing shall report to the legislative transportation
committees on the progress of the expanded internet service no later than
December 15, 2002.

(2) $4,000 of the
motor vehicle account‑‑state appropriation is provided solely for
the implementation of Senate Bill No. 5354 in the form passed by the
legislature. If Senate Bill No. 5354 is not enacted in the form passed by the
legislature the amount provided in this subsection shall lapse.

(3) $4,000 of the
motor vehicle account‑-state appropriation and $2,000 of the highway
safety account‑-state appropriation are provided solely for the
implementation of Senate Bill No. 6814 in the form passed by the legislature.
If Senate Bill No. 6814 is not enacted in the form passed by the legislature
the amounts provided in this subsection shall lapse.

(4) $27,000 of the
motor vehicle account‑-state appropriation is provided solely for the
implementation of Senate Bill No. 6494 in the form passed by the legislature.
If Senate Bill No. 6494 is not enacted in the form passed by the legislature
the amount provided in this subsection shall lapse.

(5) $29,000 of the
motor vehicle account‑-state appropriation is provided solely for the
implementation of House Bill No. 2753 in the form passed by the legislature.
If House Bill No. 2753 is not enacted in the form passed by the legislature the
amount provided in this subsection shall lapse.

(6) $1,000 of the
motor vehicle account‑-state appropriation and $19,000 of the highway
safety account‑-state appropriation are provided solely for the
implementation of Senate Bill No. 6748 in the form passed by the legislature.
If Senate Bill No. 6748 is not enacted in the form passed by the legislature
the amounts provided in this subsection shall lapse.

Sec. 215. 2001 2nd sp.s. c 14 s
213 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:

FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF LICENSING‑-VEHICLE
SERVICES

Marine Fuel Tax Refund
Account‑-

State Appropriation.................... ... $ 26,000

Wildlife Account‑-State
Appropriation.......... $ 578,000

Motor Vehicle Account‑-State
Appropriation..... $ ((57,043,000))

59,364,000

Licensing Services Account‑-State

Appropriation.............................. $ ((3,123,000))

4,128,000

TOTAL
APPROPRIATION................. $ ((60,770,000))

64,096,000

The appropriations
in this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations and
specified amounts are provided solely for the activities referenced:

(1) $584,000 of the
motor vehicle account‑-state appropriation is provided solely for the
implementation of House Bill No. 2753 in the form passed by the legislature.
If House Bill No. 2753 is not enacted in the form passed by the legislature the
amount provided in this subsection shall lapse.

(2) $82,000 of the
motor vehicle account‑-state appropriation is provided solely for the
implementation of Senate Bill No. 6814 in the form passed by the legislature.
If Senate Bill No. 6814 is not enacted in the form passed by the legislature
the amount provided in this subsection shall lapse.

(3) $549,000 of the
motor vehicle account‑-state appropriation is provided solely for the
implementation of Senate Bill No. 6494 in the form passed by the legislature.
If Senate Bill No. 6494 is not enacted in the form passed by the legislature
the amount provided in this subsection shall lapse.

(4) $376,000 of the
motor vehicle account‑-state appropriation is provided solely for the
implementation of Senate Bill No. 6748 in the form passed by the legislature.
If Senate Bill No. 6748 is not enacted in the form passed by the legislature
the amount provided in this subsection shall lapse.

(5) $81,000 of the
motor vehicle account‑-state appropriation is provided solely for the
implementation of Senate Bill No. 5354 in the form passed by the legislature.
If Senate Bill No. 5354 is not enacted in the form passed by the legislature
the amount provided in this subsection shall lapse.

(6) The department
shall work cooperatively with the national guard to develop and make available
a national guard sticker which may be affixed to a license plate. The stickers
shall be available upon application. The department shall charge a fee for the
stickers sufficient to defray the costs of production.

(7) The department
shall work cooperatively with the Washington state council of fire fighters to
develop and make available a fire fighter sticker which may be affixed to a
license plate. The stickers shall be available upon application to members of
the international association of fire fighters. The department shall charge a
fee for the stickers sufficient to defray the costs of production.

Sec. 216. 2001 2nd sp.s. c 14 s
214 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:

FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF LICENSING‑-DRIVER
SERVICES

Motorcycle Safety Education
Account‑-

State Appropriation........................ $ ((2,223,000))

2,573,000

Highway Safety Account‑-State
Appropriation.... $ ((81,366,000))

82,037,000

Highway Safety Account‑-Federal
Appropriation... $ 788,000

TOTAL
APPROPRIATION................. $ ((83,589,000))

85,398,000

The appropriations in
this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations:

(1) The
department of licensing shall prepare a capital project plan adopting a process
for using certificates of participation to purchase licensing services offices
if the combined principle and interest payments are the same or less than
existing or future leases on comparable facilities.

(2) $58,000 of the
highway safety fund‑-state appropriation is provided solely for the
implementation of Senate Bill No. 6435 in the form passed by the legislature.
If Senate Bill No. 6435 is not enacted in the form passed by the legislature
the amount provided in this subsection shall lapse.

(3) $86,000 of the
motor vehicle account‑-state appropriation is provided solely for the
implementation of House Bill No. 1630 in the form passed by the legislature.
If House Bill No. 1630 is not enacted in the form passed by the legislature the
amount provided in this subsection shall lapse.

(4) $21,000 of the
highway safety fund‑-state appropriation is provided solely for the
implementation of Senate Bill No. 6748 in the form passed by the legislature.
If Senate Bill No. 6748 is not enacted in the form passed by the legislature
the amount provided in this subsection shall lapse.

(5) $36,000 of the
highway safety fund‑-state appropriation is provided solely for the
implementation of Senate Bill No. 6814 in the form passed by the legislature.
If Senate Bill No. 6814 is not enacted in the form passed by the legislature
the amount provided in this subsection shall lapse.

Sec. 217. 2001 2nd sp.s. c 14 s
215 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:

FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF
TRANSPORTATION‑-HIGHWAY MANAGEMENT AND
FACILITIES‑-PROGRAM D‑-OPERATING

Motor Vehicle Account‑-State
Appropriation..... $ ((50,649,000))

50,644,000

Motor Vehicle Account‑-Federal
Appropriation... $ 400,000

TOTAL
APPROPRIATION................. $ ((51,049,000))

51,044,000

The appropriations in
this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations and
specified amounts are provided solely for that activity: $3,296,000 of the
motor vehicle account‑‑state appropriation is provided solely for
the implementation of Engrossed Senate Bill No. 6188.

Sec. 218. 2001 2nd sp.s. c 14 s
216 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:

FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF
TRANSPORTATION‑-AVIATION‑-PROGRAM F

Aeronautics Account‑-State
Appropriation........ $...................................... ((4,852,000))

5,349,000

Aircraft Search and Rescue
Safety and

Education Account‑-State
Appropriation..... $ 160,000

TOTAL
APPROPRIATION................. $ ((5,012,000))

5,509,000

Sec. 219. 2001 2nd sp.s. c 14 s
217 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:

FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF
TRANSPORTATION‑-IMPROVEMENTS‑-PROGRAM I

Motor Vehicle Account‑-State
Appropriation..... $ ((508,936,000))

399,472,000

Motor Vehicle Account‑-Federal
Appropriation... $ ((219,538,000))

230,929,000

Motor Vehicle Account‑-Private/Local

Appropriation.............................. $ ((40,904,000))

48,872,000

Tacoma Narrows Toll
Bridge Account‑-State

Appropriation.............................. $ 839,000,000

Special Category C Account‑-State

Appropriation.............................. $ ((72,608,000))

49,608,000

((Multimodal
Transportation Account‑-State

Appropriation.............................. $ 4,880,000))

TOTAL
APPROPRIATION................. $ ((846,866,000))

1,567,881,000

The appropriations in
this section are provided for the location, design, right of way acquisition,
or construction of state highway projects designated as improvements under RCW
47.05.030. The appropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions
and limitations and specified amounts are provided solely for that activity:

(1) The special
category C account‑-state appropriation of (($72,608,000)) $49,608,000
includes (($63,500,000)) $41,500,000 in proceeds from the sale of
bonds authorized in RCW 47.10.812. The transportation commission may authorize
the use of current revenues available to the department of transportation in
lieu of bond proceeds for any part of the state appropriation.

(2) The department
shall report December 1st and June 1st of each year to the senate and the house
of representatives transportation committees and the office of financial
management on the timing and the scope of work being performed for the regional
transit authority known as sound transit. This report shall provide a
description of all department activities related to the regional transit
authority including investments in state‑owned infrastructure.

(3) The motor vehicle
account‑-state appropriation includes (($391,637,000)) $330,364,000
in proceeds from the sale of bonds authorized by RCW 47.10.843. The
transportation commission may authorize the use of current revenues available
to the department of transportation in lieu of bond proceeds for any part of
the state appropriation.

(4) ((At least $554,714,000
of the total appropriation is provided for the construction phase of the
improvement program.

(5))) $4,880,000 of the ((multimodal
transportation)) motor vehicle account--state appropriation is
provided solely for the state program share of freight mobility projects as
identified by the freight mobility strategic investment board.

(((6))) (5)
To manage some projects more efficiently, federal funds may be transferred from
program Z to programs I and P and state funds shall be transferred from programs
I and P to program Z to replace those federal funds in a dollar-for-dollar
match. Fund transfers authorized under this subsection shall not affect
project prioritization status. Appropriations shall initially be allotted as
appropriated in this act. The department shall not transfer funds as
authorized under this subsection without approval of the transportation
commission and the director of financial management. The department shall
submit a report on those projects receiving fund transfers to the
transportation committees of the senate and house of representatives by
December 1, 2002.

(6) The motor
vehicle account--state appropriation includes $3,898,000 in unexpended proceeds
from the January 2001 bond sale authorized in RCW 47.10.834 for the Tacoma
Narrows bridge project. The transportation commission may authorize the use of
current revenues available to the department of transportation in-lieu of bond
proceeds for any part of the state appropriation.

(7) The Tacoma
narrows toll bridge account‑-state appropriation includes $800,000,000 in
proceeds from the sale of bonds authorized by RCW 47.10.843.

Sec. 220. 2001 2nd sp.s. c 14 s
218 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:

FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF
TRANSPORTATION‑-TRANSPORTATION ECONOMIC
PARTNERSHIPS‑-PROGRAM K‑‑OPERATING

Motor Vehicle Account‑-State
Appropriation..... $ ((1,153,000))

1,148,000

Sec. 221. 2001 2nd sp.s. c 14 s
220 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:

FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF
TRANSPORTATION‑-HIGHWAY MAINTENANCE‑-PROGRAM M

Motor Vehicle Account‑-State
Appropriation..... $ ((275,394,000))

275,380,000

Motor Vehicle Account‑-Federal
Appropriation... $ 512,000

Motor Vehicle Account‑-Private/Local

Appropriation.............................. $ 4,067,000

TOTAL
APPROPRIATION................. $ ((279,973,000))

279,959,000

The appropriations in
this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations and
specified amounts are provided solely for that activity:

(1) If portions of the
appropriations in this section are required to fund maintenance work resulting
from major disasters not covered by federal emergency funds such as fire,
flooding, and major slides, supplemental appropriations will be requested to
restore state funding for ongoing maintenance activities.

(2) The department
shall request an unanticipated receipt for any federal moneys received for
emergency snow and ice removal and shall place an equal amount of the motor
vehicle account‑-state into unallotted status. This exchange shall not
affect the amount of funding available for snow and ice removal.

Sec. 222. 2001 2nd sp.s. c 14 s
221 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:

FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF
TRANSPORTATION‑-PRESERVATION‑-PROGRAM P

Motor Vehicle Account‑-State
Appropriation..... $ ((90,760,000))

139,334,000

Motor Vehicle Account‑-Federal
Appropriation... $ ((318,795,000))

341,124,000

Motor Vehicle Account‑-Private/Local

Appropriation.............................. $ ((8,717,000))

7,202,000

Multimodal Transportation
Account‑-State

Appropriation.............................. $ ((64,218,000))

14,000,000

Multimodal Transportation
Account‑-Federal

Appropriation.............................. $ ((95,682,000))

56,000,000

TOTAL
APPROPRIATION................. $ ((578,172,000))

557,660,000

The appropriations in
this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations and
specified amounts are provided solely for that activity:

(1) If portions of the
appropriations in this section are required to fund preservation work resulting
from major disasters not covered by federal emergency funds such as fire,
flooding, and major slides, supplemental appropriations will be requested to restore
state funding for ongoing maintenance activities.

(2) The motor vehicle
account‑-state appropriation includes (($6,524,000 for earthquake
repairs and to match federal emergency relief funds. This amount includes))
$3,750,000 in proceeds from the sale of bonds authorized in RCW 47.10.761 and
47.10.762 for emergency purposes. The transportation commission may
authorize the use of current revenues available to the department of
transportation in lieu of bond proceeds for any part of the state appropriation.

(3) The motor
vehicle account‑-state appropriation includes $9,183,000 in proceeds from
the sale of bonds authorized by RCW 47.10.843. The transportation commission
may authorize the use of current revenues available to the department in lieu
of bond proceeds for any part of the state appropriation.

(4) The
department of transportation is authorized to maximize the use of federal and
state funds to implement the provisions of this section.

(((4) $471,763,000
of the total appropriation is provided for the construction phase of the
preservation program.))

(5) The motor vehicle
account‑-federal appropriation and the multimodal transportation account‑-federal
appropriation are transferable between each other to ensure efficient funds
management and program delivery.

(6) To manage some
projects more efficiently, federal funds may be transferred from program Z to
programs I and P and state funds shall be transferred from programs I and P to
program Z to replace those federal funds in a dollar-for-dollar match. Fund
transfers authorized under this subsection shall not affect project
prioritization status. Appropriations shall initially be allotted as
appropriated in this act. The department may not transfer funds as authorized
under this subsection without approval of the transportation commission and the
director of financial management. The department shall submit a report on
those projects receiving fund transfers to the transportation committees of the
senate and house of representatives by December 1, 2002.

(7) The department
of transportation, with approval of the transportation commission, shall expend
up to $3,000,000 of the motor vehicle account‑-state appropriation on the
incident response program. Spending on other projects within the preservation
program shall be adjusted to accommodate these expenditures.

(8) The department
of transportation, with approval of the transportation commission, shall expend
funds appropriated under this section on the Alaskan Way viaduct. Spending on
other projects within the preservation program shall be adjusted to accommodate
these expenditures.

Sec. 223. 2001 2nd sp.s. c 14 s
222 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:

FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF
TRANSPORTATION‑-TRAFFIC OPERATIONS‑-PROGRAM
Q‑‑OPERATING

Motor Vehicle Account‑-State
Appropriation..... $ 32,402,000

Motor Vehicle Account‑-Private/Local

Appropriation....... ...................... $ 125,000

TOTAL
APPROPRIATION................. $ 32,527,000

The appropriations
in this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations: If
Senate Bill No. 5949 is enacted in the form passed by the legislature, $518,000
of the motor vehicle account‑-state appropriation shall lapse.

Sec. 224. 2001 2nd sp.s. c 14 s
224 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:

FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF
TRANSPORTATION‑-TRANSPORTATION MANAGEMENT AND SUPPORT‑-PROGRAM S

State Patrol Highway
Account‑-State

Appropriation.............................. $ 926,000

Motor Vehicle Account‑-State
Appropriation..... $ ((94,632,000))

95,755,000

Motor Vehicle Account‑-Federal
Appropriation... $ 2,654,000

Puget Sound Ferry
Operations Account‑-

State Appropriation........................ $ 6,642,000

Multimodal Transportation
Account‑-State

Appropriation.............................. $ ((2,082,000))

1,397,000

TOTAL
APPROPRIATION................. $ ((106,936,000))

107,374,000

The appropriations
in this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations:
$67,000 of the motor vehicle account‑-state appropriation is provided
solely for the department of transportation to work jointly with the department
of natural resources, the military department, and the Washington state patrol,
in coordination with the state interoperability executive committee, on the
development and implementation of a secure geographical information system
(GIS) database to illustrate locations and specifications of statewide radio
and microwave towers.

Sec. 225. 2001 2nd sp.s. c 14 s
225 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:

FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF
TRANSPORTATION‑-TRANSPORTATION PLANNING, DATA, AND RESEARCH‑-PROGRAM
T

Motor Vehicle Account‑-State
Appropriation..... $ ((18,250,000))

11,496,000

Motor Vehicle Account‑-Federal
Appropriation... $ 18,800,000

Multimodal Transportation
Account‑-State

Appropriation.............................. $ 987,000

Multimodal Transportation
Account‑-Federal

Appropriation.............................. $ 2,000,000

TOTAL
APPROPRIATION................. $ ((40,037,000))

33,283,000

The appropriations in
this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations and the
specified amount is provided solely for that activity:

(((1))) The
motor vehicle account‑‑state appropriation includes $1,000,000
distributed under RCW 46.68.110(2):

(((a))) (1)
$500,000 of the distribution under RCW 46.68.110(2) is to be used solely by the
department of transportation to collect and enter collision reports into the
statewide collision reporting system for local roadway planning and safety
analysis.

(((b))) (2)
$500,000 of the distribution under RCW 46.68.110(2) is provided solely to the
department of transportation for the Washington strategic freight
transportation analysis. The department shall work with the transportation
research center to conduct an origin and destination study to determine the
impacts of trade-related truck traffic and other truck impacts on the highway
system. The department may also conduct other research elements, including,
but not limited to, freight corridor identification, strategic resource access,
and road network review.

(((2) $6,754,000 of
the motor vehicle account‑‑state appropriation is provided for the
implementation of Senate Bill No. 5749 in the form enacted by the legislature.
If Senate Bill No. 5749 is not enacted in the form passed by the legislature by
July 31, 2001, this funding shall lapse.))

Sec. 226. 2001 2nd sp.s. c 14 s
226 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:

FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF
TRANSPORTATION‑-CHARGES FROM OTHER AGENCIES‑-PROGRAM U

Payments in this
section represent charges from other state agencies to the department of
transportation.

(1) FOR PAYMENT OF
DEPARTMENT OF GENERAL ADMINISTRATION OFFICE OF RISK MANAGEMENT FEES

Motor Vehicle Account‑‑State
Appropriation..... $ 464,000

Puget Sound Ferry
Operations‑‑State

Appropriation.............................. $ 154,000

(2) FOR PAYMENT OF
COSTS OF THE OFFICE OF THE STATE AUDITOR

Motor Vehicle Account‑-State
Appropriation..... $ ((731,000))

713,000

(3) FOR PAYMENT OF
COSTS OF DEPARTMENT OF GENERAL ADMINISTRATION FACILITIES AND SERVICES AND
CONSOLIDATED MAIL SERVICES

Motor Vehicle Account‑-State
Appropriation..... $ ((4,128,000))

4,047,000

(4) FOR PAYMENT OF
COSTS OF THE DEPARTMENT OF PERSONNEL

Motor Vehicle Account‑-State
Appropriation..... $ ((2,240,000))

2,237,000

(5) FOR PAYMENT OF
SELF-INSURANCE LIABILITY PREMIUMS AND ADMINISTRATION

Motor Vehicle Account‑-State
Appropriation..... $ ((13,892,000))

28,755,000

Motor Vehicle Fund‑-Puget
Sound Ferry Operations Account‑-

State Appropriation........................ $ 4,204,000

The office of risk
management shall evaluate the risk pool premium assessments to ensure that
proper tracking, measuring, and reporting methods have been utilized to ensure
funding equity has been maintained. "Funding equity" includes but is
not limited to demonstrating that premiums assessed to the department of
transportation will, over time, not exceed claims paid in order to ensure that
premiums paid by the department of transportation are not unconstitutionally
expended for nonhighway purposes. The office of risk management shall make a
full report of its findings to the legislature no later than January 15, 2002.

(6) FOR PAYMENT OF
COSTS OF OFFICE OF MINORITY AND WOMEN'S BUSINESS ENTERPRISES

Motor Vehicle Account‑-State
Appropriation..... $ 251,000

(7) FOR PAYMENT OF THE
DEPARTMENT OF GENERAL ADMINISTRATION CAPITAL PROJECTS SURCHARGE

Motor Vehicle Account‑-State
Appropriation..... $ 1,547,000

(8) FOR ARCHIVES AND
RECORDS MANAGEMENT

Motor Vehicle Account‑-State
Appropriation..... $ ((469,000))

457,000

TOTAL
APPROPRIATION................. $ ((28,080,000))

42,829,000

Sec. 227. 2001 2nd sp.s. c 14 s
227 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:

FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF
TRANSPORTATION‑-PUBLIC TRANSPORTATION‑-PROGRAM
V

Multimodal Transportation
Account‑-State

Appropriation.............................. $ ((11,160,000))

10,960,000

Multimodal Transportation
Account‑-Federal

Appropriation.............................. $ 3,074,000

Multimodal Transportation
Account‑‑

Private/Local
Appropriation................ $ 205,000

TOTAL
APPROPRIATION................. $ ((14,439,000))

14,239,000

Sec. 228. 2001 2nd sp.s. c 14 s
228 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:

FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF
TRANSPORTATION‑-WASHINGTON STATE FERRIES CONSTRUCTION‑-PROGRAM W

Motor Vehicle Account‑-State

Appropriation.............................. $ ((144,404,000))

134,390,000

Motor Vehicle Account‑-Federal

Appropriation.............................. $ 37,472,000

Passenger Ferry Account‑-State
Appropriation... $ 1,500,000

Passenger Ferry Account‑-Federal

Appropriation.............................. $ 4,000,000

TOTAL
APPROPRIATION................. $ ((187,376,000))

177,362,000

The appropriations in
this section are provided for improving the Washington state ferry system,
including, but not limited to, vessel acquisition, vessel construction, major
and minor vessel improvements, and terminal construction and improvements. The
appropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and
limitations and specified amounts are provided solely for that activity:

(1) The motor vehicle
account‑-state appropriation includes (($50,000,000)) $53,440,000
in proceeds from the sale of bonds authorized by RCW 47.10.843 for vessel and
terminal acquisition, major and minor improvements, and long lead time
materials acquisition for the Washington state ferries. The transportation
commission may authorize the use of current revenues available to the motor
vehicle account in lieu of bond proceeds for any part of the state
appropriation.

(2) Appropriations in
this section include funding for the purchase or lease-purchase of one
passenger ferry and assume the proceeds of the sale of the MV Kalama and MV
Skagit passenger ferries shall be deposited in the passenger ferry account.

(3) The department
shall provide staff support to a legislative oversight committee that will
manage a study of the Eagle Harbor maintenance facility. The legislative
oversight committee shall consist of two members from each caucus in each house
of the legislature, appointed by the leadership of the members' respective
caucus. The department shall issue a request for proposals on behalf of the
legislative oversight committee for an outside consulting firm to conduct a
study on the preservation, replacement, or supplementation of the Eagle Harbor
maintenance facility. The study must analyze: (a) The costs and benefits to
preserve and maintain or relocate the facility; (b) the impact of Eagle Harbor
employment on the local community and Kitsap county; and (c) a recommendation
on future investment in the Eagle Harbor maintenance facility or possible
alternatives. The contractor and the legislative oversight committee must
report back to the legislature's transportation committees no later than
December 10, 2002.

Sec. 229. 2001 2nd sp.s. c 14 s
229 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:

FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF
TRANSPORTATION‑-MARINE‑-PROGRAM X

Puget Sound Ferry
Operations Account‑-State

Appropriation.............................. $ ((321,673,000))

311,312,000

The appropriation in
this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations and
specified amounts are provided solely for that activity:

(1) The appropriation
is based on the budgeted expenditure of (($46,881,000)) $35,159,000
for vessel operating fuel in the 2001-2003 biennium. If the actual cost of
fuel is less than this budgeted amount, the excess amount may not be expended.
If the actual cost exceeds this amount, the department shall request a
supplemental appropriation.

(2) The appropriation
provides for the compensation of ferry employees. The expenditures for
compensation paid to ferry employees during the 2001-2003 biennium may not
exceed (($206,696,000)) $207,065,000 plus a dollar amount, as
prescribed by the office of financial management, that is equal to any
insurance benefit increase granted general government employees in excess of
$432.82 a month annualized per eligible marine employee multiplied by the
number of eligible marine employees for the respective fiscal year, a dollar
amount as prescribed by the office of financial management for costs associated
with pension amortization charges, and a dollar amount prescribed by the office
of financial management for salary increases during the 2001-2003 biennium. For
the purposes of this section, the expenditures for compensation paid to ferry
employees shall be limited to salaries and wages and employee benefits as
defined in the office of financial management's policies, regulations, and
procedures named under objects of expenditure "A" and "B"
(7.2.6.2).

The prescribed salary
and insurance benefit increase or decrease dollar amount that shall be
allocated from the governor's compensation appropriations is in addition to the
appropriation contained in this section and may be used to increase or decrease
compensation costs, effective July 1, 2001, and thereafter, as established in
the 2001-2003 general fund operating budget.

(3) The department
shall issue a request for information from entities interested in purchasing
advertising on board Washington state ferry vessels. The department shall
evaluate the proposals and report back to the legislature's transportation
committees in January 2002 regarding the potential for revenue from different
types of advertising.

(4) The department may
enter into contracts with private vendors to sell ferry tickets and medium at
locations other than Washington state ferry terminals or facilities.

(a) The department may
enter into the contracts only (i) with private vendors that are already
established businesses offering goods for sale to the general public; and (ii)
if it determines that the vendor's established location has the potential to
serve a significant percentage of the customers using a particular ferry route.

(b) The department may
adopt necessary rules and procedures to allow the use of credit and debit cards
to purchase ferry tickets or medium from a private vendor who has contracted
with the department to sell ferry tickets or medium. The department may
establish a convenience fee to be paid by all persons purchasing ferry tickets
and medium at locations other than Washington state ferry terminals or
facilities. The convenience fee must be sufficient to offset the charges
imposed on the department by the credit and debit card companies. In no event
may the use of credit or debit cards authorized by this section create a loss
of revenue to the state. The use of a personal credit card does not rely upon
the credit of the state as prohibited by Article VIII, section 5 of the state
Constitution.

(5) ((The
legislature recognizes that projected revenues to the Puget Sound ferry
operating account for the 2001-2003 biennium may be up to $30,000,000 less than
what is required to fund the appropriation provided in this section. The
legislature intends to fully evaluate the extent of the shortfall and make a
supplemental appropriation during the 2002 legislative session.)) The
legislature recognizes the value of a regional fare collection system to
promote intermodal travel throughout Washington state ferries' Puget Sound
service area and therefore encourages the department to resume participation in
the regional fare coordination project (smart card). The department shall
develop a request for funding of the on‑going operating costs associated
with the regional fare coordination project and shall present this request to
the 2003 legislature. The request for funding shall be sufficient to support a
system that prevents the disclosure of personally identifying information of persons
who use a smart card to facilitate payment of ferry fares. The requested
system may facilitate the disclosure of aggregate information on fare
collection to governmental agencies or groups concerned with public
transportation or public safety as long as the data does not contain any
personally identifying information. The requested system shall not prevent the
release of personally identifying information to law enforcement agencies when
required by a subpoena.

Sec. 230. 2001 2nd sp.s. c 14 s
230 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:

FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF
TRANSPORTATION‑-RAIL‑-PROGRAM Y‑‑OPERATING

Multimodal
Transportation Account‑-State

Appropriation.............................. $ ((32,704,000))

33,001,000

Sec. 231. 2001 2nd sp.s. c 14 s
231 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:

FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF
TRANSPORTATION‑-RAIL‑-PROGRAM Y‑‑CAPITAL

Essential Rail Assistance
Account‑-State

Appropriation.............................. $ ((200,000))

600,000

Multimodal
Transportation Account‑-State

Appropriation.............................. $ ((11,610,000))

10,710,000

Multimodal
Transportation Account‑-Federal

Appropriation.............................. $ 9,630,000

Washington Fruit Express
Account‑-State

Appropriation.............................. $ 500,000

TOTAL
APPROPRIATION........................ $ ((21,940,000))

21,440,000

The appropriations in
this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations and
specified amounts are provided solely for that activity:

(1) $2,000,000
of the multimodal transportation account‑-state appropriation is provided
solely for the Grays Harbor loop project.

(2) The entire
Washington fruit express account is provided solely to promote the shipment of
a variety of agricultural products, including, but not limited to, apples,
pears, and potatoes.

Sec. 232. 2001 2nd sp.s. c 14 s
232 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:

FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF
TRANSPORTATION‑-LOCAL PROGRAMS‑-PROGRAM Z‑‑OPERATING

Motor Vehicle Account‑-State
Appropriation..... $ ((6,231,000))

6,494,000

Motor Vehicle Account‑-Federal
Appropriation... $ 2,569,000

Multimodal Transportation
Account‑-State

Appropriation.............................. $ 150,000

TOTAL
APPROPRIATION........................ $ ((8,950,000))

9,213,000

The appropriations in
this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations and
specified amounts are provided solely for that activity:

(1) The motor vehicle
account‑-state appropriation includes $150,000 distributed under RCW
46.68.110(2) that is provided to the Whatcom county council of governments for
the sole purpose of developing and implementing a model of regional
transportation governance. This model shall be developed in accordance with
Recommendation 6 of the Blue Ribbon Commission on Transportation's final
report.

The council shall
develop a model that can be used in other parts of the state and shall report
to the transportation committees in the senate and house of representatives on
the positive and negative aspects of the model as well as costs associated with
it no later than June 30, 2002.

(2) $250,000 of the
motor vehicle account‑-state appropriation is provided solely for a study
of concurrency issues in urban areas marked by multiple contiguous
jurisdictions. The study, lead by the city of Bellevue, will focus on the
jurisdictions of Bellevue, Kirkland, Issaquah, and Redmond and will look at
existing and unused methodologies for including development in neighboring
jurisdictions in concurrency calculations. The study will also investigate
what changes in state and local laws are needed in order to provide a more
effective way of dealing with concurrency issues. By November 1, 2003, a
report of the findings will be made to the transportation committees of the
legislature. The appropriation in this subsection shall lapse unless the
participating cities provide $100,000 for the study. To the extent
possible, state funding for this subsection shall utilize funds allocated under
RCW 46.68.110(2).

(3) Up to $500,000 of
the motor vehicle account‑-state appropriation is provided solely for the
study of alternatives for repairing or replacing the Seattle sea wall. The
department's expenditure of funds provided in this subsection may not exceed
the matching contribution provided by the city of Seattle for the study.

Sec. 233. 2001 2nd sp.s. c 14 s
233 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:

FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF
TRANSPORTATION‑-LOCAL PROGRAMS‑-PROGRAM Z‑‑CAPITAL

Motor Vehicle Account‑-State
Appropriation..... $ ((77,371,000))

77,221,000

Highway Infrastructure
Account‑-State

Appropriation.............................. $ 234,000

Highway Infrastructure
Account‑-Federal

Appropriation.............................. $ 1,500,000

Urban Arterial Trust
Account‑-State

Appropriation.............................. $ ((4,674,000))

4,332,000

Multimodal Transportation
Account‑-State

Appropriation.............................. $ 10,150,000

TOTAL
APPROPRIATION........................ $ ((93,929,000))

93,437,000

The appropriations in
this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations and
specified amounts are provided solely for that activity:

(((2))) (1)
$10,000,000 of the multimodal transportation account‑-state appropriation
is provided solely to fund the first phase of a multiphase cooperative project
with the state of Oregon to dredge the Columbia river. The department shall
not expend the appropriation in this section unless agreement on ocean disposal
sites has been reached which protects the state's commercial crab fishery. The
amount provided in this subsection shall lapse unless the state of Oregon
appropriates a dollar-for-dollar match to fund its share of the project.

(((3))) (2)
The motor vehicle account‑-state appropriation includes (($12,000,000))
$60,650,000 in proceeds from the sale of bonds authorized by RCW
47.10.843 in addition to $16,420,000 in unexpended proceeds from the January
2001 sale. The transportation commission may authorize the use of current
revenues available to the department of transportation in lieu of bond proceeds
for any part of the state appropriation.

(((4))) (3)
$4,159,000 of the motor vehicle account‑-state appropriation is provided
solely for additional small city pavement preservation program grants, to be
administered by the department's highways and local programs division.

(((5))) (4)
$2,000,000 of the motor vehicle account‑-state appropriation is provided
solely for additional traffic and pedestrian safety improvements near schools.
The highways and local programs division within the department of
transportation shall administer this program.

(5) To
manage some projects more efficiently, federal funds may be transferred from
program Z to programs I and P and state funds shall be transferred from
programs I and P to program Z to replace those federal funds in a
dollar-for-dollar match. Fund transfers authorized under this subsection shall
not affect project prioritization status. Appropriations shall initially be
allotted as appropriated in this act. The department may not transfer funds as
authorized under this subsection without approval of the transportation
commission and the director of financial management. The department shall
submit a report on those projects receiving fund transfers to the
transportation committees of the senate and house of representatives by
December 1, 2002.

(End
of part)

TRANSPORTATION AGENCIES CAPITAL
FACILITIES

Sec. 301. 2001 2nd sp.s. c 14 s
301 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:

FOR THE WASHINGTON STATE PATROL

State Patrol Highway
Account‑-State

Appropriation.............................. $ 780,000

Motor Vehicle Account‑-State
Appropriation..... $ ((2,705,000))

1,830,000

TOTAL
APPROPRIATION................. $ ((3,485,000))

2,610,000

(End
of part)

TRANSFERS AND DISTRIBUTIONS

Sec. 401. 2001 2nd sp.s. c 14 s
401 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:

FOR THE STATE TREASURER‑-BOND RETIREMENT AND
INTEREST, AND ONGOING BOND REGISTRATION AND TRANSFER CHARGES: FOR BOND SALES
DISCOUNTS AND DEBT TO BE PAID BY MOTOR VEHICLE FUND AND TRANSPORTATION FUND
REVENUE

Highway Bond Retirement
Account Appropriation... $........................................... ((207,900,000))

208,206,000

Ferry Bond Retirement
Account Appropriation.... $ ((48,675,000))

52,473,000

Transportation Improvement
Board Bond Retirement

Account‑-State
Appropriation............... $ 40,856,000

Motor Vehicle Account‑-State
Appropriation..... $ ((4,537,000))

4,588,000

Special Category C Account‑-State
Appropriation $ ((635,000))

631,000

Transportation Improvement
Account‑-State

Appropriation.............................. $ ((473,000))

340,000

TOTAL
APPROPRIATION................. $ ((303,076,000))

307,094,000

Sec. 402. 2001 2nd sp.s. c 14 s
402 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:

FOR THE STATE TREASURER‑-BOND RETIREMENT AND
INTEREST, AND ONGOING BOND REGISTRATION AND TRANSFER CHARGES: FOR BOND SALE
EXPENSES AND FISCAL AGENT CHARGES

Motor Vehicle Account‑-State
Appropriation..... $ ((450,000))

459,000

Special Category C Account
Appropriation........ $...................................... ((63,000))

41,000

Transportation Improvement
Account‑-State

Appropriation.............................. $ ((47,000))

34,000

TOTAL
APPROPRIATION................. $ ((560,000))

534,000

Sec. 403. 2001 2nd sp.s. c 14 s
403 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:

FOR THE STATE TREASURER‑-STATE
REVENUES FOR DISTRIBUTION

((Motor Vehicle Account
Appropriation for

motor vehicle fuel tax
refunds and

distributions.................................. $ 458,895,000))

Motor Vehicle Account
Appropriation for

motor vehicle fuel tax
distributions to

cities and counties............................ $ ((428,546,000))

428,981,000

((Motor Vehicle Account
Appropriation for

license, permit, and fee
distribution to

other accounts................................. $ 349,936,000))

Sec. 404. 2001 2nd sp.s. c 14 s
406 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:

FOR THE STATE TREASURER‑-TRANSFERS

(1) RV Account‑-State
Appropriation:

For transfer to the Motor
Vehicle Fund‑-State... $........................................... ((1,135,000))

1,344,000

The department of
transportation shall only transfer funds provided under subsection (1) of this
section on an as‑needed basis.

(2) Public
Transportation Systems Account‑-

State Appropriation: For
transfer to the

Multimodal Transportation
Account--State........ $...................................... 1,911,000

(3) State Patrol
Highway Account‑-State

Appropriation: For
transfer to the Motor

Vehicle Account................................ $ ((38,657,000))

43,657,000

(4) Motor Vehicle
Account‑-State

Appropriation: For
motor vehicle fuel tax

refunds and transfers.......................... $ 453,279,000

(5) Motor Vehicle
Account‑-State

Appropriation: For
license, permit, and

fee transfers to other
accounts................ $ 350,669,000

(6) Urban Arterial
Trust Account‑-State

Appropriation: For
transfer of excess City

Hardship Assistance
Program revenues to

cities......................................... $ 1,500,000

(7) Highway Safety
Account‑-State

Appropriation: For
transfer to the multimodal

transportation account......................... $ 20,000,000

(8) Motor Vehicle
Account‑-State

Appropriation: For
transfer to the Tacoma

Narrows toll bridge
account.................... $ 800,000,000

(9) Motor Vehicle
Account‑-State

Appropriation: For
transfer to the Tacoma

Narrows toll bridge
account.................... $ $39,000,000

((If House Bill No.
2216 or Senate Bill No. 5078 is enacted in the form passed by the legislature,
the $38,737,000 transfer from the state patrol highway account‑-state to
the motor vehicle account is null and void. If neither House Bill No. 2216 nor
Senate Bill No. 5078 is enacted in the form passed by the legislature, the
state treasurer shall transfer funds from the state patrol highway account to
the motor vehicle account on a quarterly basis.)) (1) If Senate Bill No.
6814 is enacted in the form passed by the legislature, $16,191,000 of the
transfer from the Washington state patrol account‑-state to the motor
vehicle account‑-state shall lapse. The state treasurer shall perform
the transfers from the state patrol highway account to the motor vehicle account
on a quarterly basis.

(2) The department
of transportation is authorized to sell up to $800,000,000 in bonds authorized
by RCW 47.10.843 for the Tacoma Narrows bridge project. Proceeds from the sale
of the bonds shall be deposited into the Tacoma Narrows toll bridge account.
The department of transportation shall inform the treasurer of the amount to be
deposited.

Sec. 405. 2001 2nd sp.s. c 14 s
407 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:

FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF
TRANSPORTATION‑-TRANSFERS

(1) Motor Vehicle
Fund--State Appropriation:

For transfer to Puget Sound
Ferry Operations

Account........................................ $ ((27,000,000))

38,300,000

(2) Advanced Right of
Way Revolving Account

Appropriation: For
transfer to the Motor

Vehicle Fund........................................ $ 15,000,000

(End
of part)

PROVISIONS NECESSARY TO IMPLEMENT
APPROPRIATIONS

NEW SECTION. Sec.
601. If any provision of this
act or its application to any person or circumstance is held invalid, the
remainder of the act or the application of the provision to other persons or
circumstances is not affected.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
602. The following bills are
necessary to implement this act: Senate Bill No. 6814 in the form enacted by
the legislature and Senate Bill No. 6494 in the form enacted by the
legislature.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 603. This act is necessary for
the immediate preservation of the public peace, health, or safety, or support
of the state government and its existing public institutions, and takes effect
immediately.

(End
of part)

INDEX PAGE
#

BOARD OF PILOTAGE
COMMISSIONERS................................ 10

COUNTY ROAD ADMINISTRATION BOARD

CAPITAL PROGRAM................................................. 4

OPERATING PROGRAM............................................... 4

DEPARTMENT OF LICENSING

DRIVER SERVICES................................................ 16

INFORMATION SYSTEMS............................................ 14

MANAGEMENT AND SUPPORT SERVICES................................ 12

VEHICLE SERVICES............................................... 15

DEPARTMENT OF TRANSPORTATION

AVIATION--PROGRAM F............................................ 18

CHARGES FROM OTHER AGENCIES--PROGRAM U......................... 25

HIGHWAY MAINTENANCE--PROGRAM M................................. 20

HIGHWAY MANAGEMENT AND FACILITIES--PROGRAM
D--OPERATING........ 17

IMPROVEMENTS--PROGRAM I........................................ 18

LOCAL PROGRAMS--PROGRAM Z.................................. 30,
32

MARINE--PROGRAM X.............................................. 27

PRESERVATION--PROGRAM P........................................ 21

PUBLIC TRANSPORTATION--PROGRAM V............................... 26

RAIL--PROGRAM Y................................................ 30

TRAFFIC OPERATIONS--PROGRAM Q.................................. 23

TRANSFERS...................................................... 37

TRANSPORTATION ECONOMIC PARTNERSHIPS--PROGRAM K................ 20

TRANSPORTATION MANAGEMENT AND SUPPORT--PROGRAM S............... 23

TRANSPORTATION PLANNING, DATA, AND RESEARCH--PROGRAM
T......... 24

WASHINGTON STATE FERRIES CONSTRUCTION--PROGRAM W............... 26

LEGISLATIVE EVALUATION AND ACCOUNTABILITY PROGRAM............... 1

LEGISLATIVE TRANSPORTATION COMMITTEE............................ 6

MARINE EMPLOYEES COMMISSION.................................... 10

STATE TREASURER

BOND RETIREMENT AND INTEREST................................... 35

STATE REVENUES FOR DISTRIBUTION................................ 36

TRANSFERS...................................................... 36

TRANSPORTATION COMMISSION...................................... 10

TRANSPORTATION IMPROVEMENT BOARD

CAPITAL PROGRAM................................................. 6

OPERATING PROGRAM............................................... 5

WASHINGTON STATE PATROL........................................ 34

FIELD OPERATIONS BUREAU........................................ 10

INVESTIGATIVE SERVICES BUREAU.................................. 12

SUPPORT SERVICES BUREAU........................................ 11

WASHINGTON TRAFFIC SAFETY COMMISSION............................ 3

---
END ---