BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF
WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec.
1. (1) The legislature
recognizes that a good transportation system is critical in keeping Washington
state's economy strong and its businesses competitive. The legislature further
recognizes that badly needed investments in our state's transportation
infrastructure will create jobs and help to ensure Washington's long-term
economic success.

(2) The transportation
investment act of 2002 is hereby adopted and, subject to the provisions
hereinafter set forth, the several amounts hereinafter specified, or as much
thereof as may be necessary to accomplish the purposes designated, are hereby
appropriated from the several accounts and funds hereinafter named to the
designated state agencies and offices for employee compensation and other
expenses, for capital projects, and for other specified purposes, including the
payment of any final judgments arising out of such activities, for the period
ending June 30, 2003.

(3) Unless the context
clearly requires otherwise, the definitions in this subsection apply throughout
the act.

(a) "Fiscal year
2002" or "FY 2002" means the fiscal year ending June 30, 2002.

(b) "Fiscal year
2003" or "FY 2003" means the fiscal year ending June 30, 2003.

(c) "FTE"
means full-time equivalent.

(d) "Lapse"
or "revert" means the amount shall return to an unappropriated
status.

(e) "Provided
solely" means the specified amount may be spent only for the specified
purpose.

PART
1

GENERAL GOVERNMENT AGENCIES‑-OPERATING

NEW SECTION. Sec.
101. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF REVENUE

Multimodal Transportation
Account‑-State

Appropriation.............................. $ 115,000

PART
2

OPERATING‑-TRANSPORTATION
AGENCIES

NEW SECTION. Sec.
201. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF
TRANSPORTATION‑-PUBLIC TRANSPORTATION‑-PROGRAM
V

Multimodal Transportation
Account‑-State

Appropriation.............................. $ 44,785,000

The appropriation in
this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations and
specified amounts are provided solely for that activity: $40,000,000 of the
multimodal transportation account‑-state appropriation is provided solely
for grants for transit, special needs transportation, and rural mobility. The
department shall work cooperatively with the agency council on coordinated
transportation and the Washington state transit association to establish grant
application procedures and selection criteria.

PART
3

CAPITAL‑-TRANSPORTATION AGENCIES
CAPITAL FACILITIES

NEW SECTION. Sec.
301. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF
TRANSPORTATION‑-CAPITAL FACILITIES‑-PROGRAM
D

Thurston County Light
Industrial

The appropriation in
this section is provided for the department of transportation's share of site
acquisition costs for the Thurston County light industrial complex. It is the
intent of the legislature that the department's share of future project costs
be supported by the sale of the department's existing facilities that are being
replaced.

Appropriation:

Motor Vehicle Account‑-State.................... $ 3,100,000

Prior Biennia
(Expenditures).................... $ 0

Future Biennia
(Projected Costs)................ $ 41,582,000

TOTAL.................................... $ 44,682,000

PART
4

CAPITAL‑-HIGHWAY IMPROVEMENTS AND
PRESERVATION

The motor vehicle
account‑-state appropriations of $384,606,000 in sections 401 through 540
of this act include $383,000,000 in proceeds from the sale of bonds authorized
by RCW 47.10.843. The transportation commission may authorize the use of
current revenues available to the department of transportation in lieu of bond
proceeds for any part of the state appropriation.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
401. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF
TRANSPORTATION‑-IMPROVEMENTS‑-PROGRAM
I

US 2 - SR 522 Monroe
Bypass - Design, Right of Way, and Construction

Appropriation:

Motor Vehicle Account‑-State.................... $ 1,261,000

Prior Biennia
(Expenditures).................... $ 0

Future Biennia
(Projected Costs)................ $ 47,159,000

TOTAL.................................... $ 48,420,000

NEW SECTION. Sec.
402. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF
TRANSPORTATION‑-IMPROVEMENTS‑-PROGRAM I

US 2 - SR 206 Grade
Separation - Design

Appropriation:

Motor Vehicle Account‑-State.................... $ 2,922,000

Prior Biennia
(Expenditures).................... $ 0

Future Biennia
(Projected Costs)................ $ 78,000

TOTAL.................................... $ 3,000,000

NEW SECTION. Sec.
403. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF
TRANSPORTATION‑-IMPROVEMENTS‑-PROGRAM I

State Route 3 - Allyn
to SR 106 Vicinity Safety - Construction

Appropriation:

Motor Vehicle Account‑-State.................... $ 978,000

Prior Biennia
(Expenditures).................... $ 0

Future Biennia (Projected
Costs)................ $ 3,313,000

TOTAL.................................... $ 4,291,000

NEW SECTION. Sec.
404. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF
TRANSPORTATION‑-IMPROVEMENTS‑-PROGRAM I

State Route 3 - SR 303
Interchange (Waaga Way) New Ramp - Construction

Appropriation:

Motor Vehicle Account‑-State.................... $ 620,000

Prior Biennia
(Expenditures).................... $ 0

Future Biennia
(Projected Costs)................ $ 4,465,000

TOTAL.................................... $ 5,085,000

NEW SECTION. Sec.
405. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF
TRANSPORTATION‑-IMPROVEMENTS‑-PROGRAM I

State Route 3 - Deer
Creek Loop Road to Agate Road - Construction

Appropriation:

Motor Vehicle Account‑-State.................... $ 87,000

Prior Biennia
(Expenditures).................... $ 0

Future Biennia
(Projected Costs)................ $ 484,000

TOTAL.................................... $ 571,000

NEW SECTION. Sec.
406. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF
TRANSPORTATION‑-IMPROVEMENTS‑-PROGRAM I

State Route 4 -
Svensen's Curve Realignment - Right of Way and Construction

Appropriation:

Motor Vehicle Account‑-State.................... $ 1,435,000

Prior Biennia
(Expenditures).................... $ 145,518

Future Biennia
(Projected Costs)................ $ 3,011,000

TOTAL.................................... $ 4,591,518

NEW SECTION. Sec.
407. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF
TRANSPORTATION‑-IMPROVEMENTS‑-PROGRAM I

Interstate 5 -
Interstate Bridge Replacement - Design

Appropriation:

Motor Vehicle Account‑-State.................... $ 1,550,000

Prior Biennia
(Expenditures).................... $ 0

Future Biennia
(Projected Costs)................ $ 27,750,000

TOTAL.................................... $ 29,300,000

NEW SECTION. Sec.
408. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF
TRANSPORTATION‑-IMPROVEMENTS‑-PROGRAM I

Interstate 5 -
Airdustrial NB On Ramp Safety - Construction

Appropriation:

Motor Vehicle Account‑-State.................... $ 276,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures).................... $ 0

Future Biennia
(Projected Costs)................ $ 453,000

TOTAL.................................... $ 729,000

NEW SECTION. Sec.
409. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF
TRANSPORTATION‑-IMPROVEMENTS‑-PROGRAM I

Interstate 5 - Martin
Way Overcrossing Bike Lanes - Construction

Appropriation:

Motor Vehicle Account‑-State.................... $ 363,000

Prior Biennia
(Expenditures).................... $ 0

Future Biennia
(Projected Costs)................ $ 199,000

TOTAL.................................... $ 562,000

NEW SECTION. Sec.
410. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF
TRANSPORTATION‑-IMPROVEMENTS‑-PROGRAM I

Interstate 5 - SR 16
Interchange/38th Street Interchange - Construction

Appropriation:

Motor Vehicle Account‑-State.................... $ 6,324,000

Prior Biennia
(Expenditures).................... $ 0

Future Biennia
(Projected Costs)................ $ 250,241,000

TOTAL.................................... $ 256,565,000

NEW SECTION. Sec.
411. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF
TRANSPORTATION‑-IMPROVEMENTS‑-PROGRAM I

Interstate 5 - South 48th
to South M Street Core HOV - Construction

Appropriation:

Motor Vehicle Account‑-State.................... $ 13,065,000

Prior Biennia
(Expenditures).................... $ 0

Future Biennia
(Projected Costs)................ $ 20,496,000

TOTAL.................................... $ 33,561,000

NEW SECTION. Sec.
412. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF
TRANSPORTATION‑-IMPROVEMENTS‑-PROGRAM I

Interstate 5 - I-705 to
Port of Tacoma Interchange Core HOV - Design and Right of Way

Appropriation:

Motor Vehicle Account‑-State.................... $ 728,000

Prior Biennia
(Expenditures).................... $ 0

Future Biennia
(Projected Costs)................ $ 8,483,000

TOTAL.................................... $ 9,211,000

NEW SECTION. Sec.
413. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF
TRANSPORTATION‑-IMPROVEMENTS‑-PROGRAM I

Interstate 5 - East
"L" Street to Puyallup Bridge Core HOV - Design and Right of Way

Appropriation:

Motor Vehicle Account‑-State.................... $ 852,000

Prior Biennia
(Expenditures).................... $ 5,519,556

Future Biennia
(Projected Costs)................ $ 37,994,000

TOTAL................................ ... $ 44,365,556

NEW SECTION. Sec.
414. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF
TRANSPORTATION‑-IMPROVEMENTS‑-PROGRAM I

Interstate 5 - Port of
Tacoma Interchange Core HOV - Construction

Appropriation:

Motor Vehicle Account‑-State.................... $ 0

Prior Biennia
(Expenditures).................... $ 0

Future Biennia
(Projected Costs)................ $ 17,910,000

TOTAL.................................... $ 17,910,000

NEW SECTION. Sec.
415. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF
TRANSPORTATION‑-IMPROVEMENTS‑-PROGRAM I

Interstate 5 - Port of
Tacoma Road to King County Line Core HOV - Construction

Appropriation:

Motor Vehicle Account‑-State.................... $ 0

Prior Biennia
(Expenditures).................... $ 0

Future Biennia
(Projected Costs)................ $ 18,648,000

TOTAL.................................... $ 18,648,000

NEW SECTION. Sec.
416. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF
TRANSPORTATION‑-IMPROVEMENTS‑-PROGRAM I

Interstate 5 - Pierce
County Line to Tukwila I/C, Core HOV - Design, Right of Way, and Construction

Appropriation:

Motor Vehicle Account‑-State.................... $ 6,450,000

Prior Biennia
(Expenditures).................... $ 223,637

Future Biennia
(Projected Costs)................ $ 132,723,000

TOTAL.................................... $ 139,396,637

NEW SECTION. Sec.
417. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF
TRANSPORTATION‑-IMPROVEMENTS‑-PROGRAM I

Interstate 5 - South
320th Street to South 210th Street Stage 1 and 2, Auxiliary Lanes - Design,
Right of Way, and Construction

Appropriation:

Motor Vehicle Account‑-State.................... $ 4,746,000

Prior Biennia
(Expenditures).................... $ 0

Future Biennia
(Projected Costs)................ $ 107,218,000

TOTAL.................................... $ 111,964,000

NEW SECTION. Sec.
418. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF
TRANSPORTATION‑-IMPROVEMENTS‑-PROGRAM I

Interstate 5 - Junction
SR 518 Direct HOV Ramp - Design and Construction

Appropriation:

Motor Vehicle Account‑-State.................... $ 1,074,000

Prior Biennia
(Expenditures).................... $ 0

Future Biennia
(Projected Costs)................ $ 43,264,000

TOTAL.................................... $ 44,338,000

NEW SECTION. Sec.
419. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF
TRANSPORTATION‑-IMPROVEMENTS‑-PROGRAM I

Interstate 5 -
Industrial Way Vicinity Transit Ramp - Design and Right of Way

Appropriation:

Motor Vehicle Account‑-State.................... $ 1,289,000

Prior Biennia
(Expenditures).................... $ 0

Future Biennia
(Projected Costs)................ $ 8,016,000

TOTAL.................................... $ 9,305,000

NEW SECTION. Sec.
420. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF
TRANSPORTATION‑-IMPROVEMENTS‑-PROGRAM I

Interstate 5 - SR 520
Interchange Vicinity, Noise Walls - Design and Construction

Appropriation:

Motor Vehicle Account‑-State.................... $ 15,000

Prior Biennia
(Expenditures).................... $ 0

Future Biennia
(Projected Costs)................ $ 3,617,000

TOTAL.................................... $ 3,632,000

NEW SECTION. Sec.
421. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF
TRANSPORTATION‑-IMPROVEMENTS‑-PROGRAM I

Interstate 5 - NE 76th
Street to NE 82nd Street, Noise Walls - Design and Construction

Appropriation:

Motor Vehicle Account‑-State.................... $ 69,000

Prior Biennia
(Expenditures).................... $ 0

Future Biennia
(Projected Costs)................ $ 709,000

TOTAL.................................... $ 778,000

NEW SECTION. Sec.
422. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF
TRANSPORTATION‑-IMPROVEMENTS‑-PROGRAM I

Interstate 5 - North
180th Street, Noise Walls - Construction

Appropriation:

Motor Vehicle Account‑-State.................... $ 250,000

Prior Biennia
(Expenditures).................... $ 0

Future Biennia
(Projected Costs)................ $ 678,000

TOTAL.................................... $ 928,000

NEW SECTION. Sec.
423. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF
TRANSPORTATION‑-IMPROVEMENTS‑-PROGRAM I

Interstate 5 - NE 175th
Street to NE 205th Street NB Lane - Construction

Appropriation:

Motor Vehicle Account‑-State.................... $ 1,592,000

Prior Biennia
(Expenditures).................... $ 0

Future Biennia (Projected
Costs)................ $ 4,330,000

TOTAL.................................... $ 5,922,000

NEW SECTION. Sec.
424. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF
TRANSPORTATION‑-IMPROVEMENTS‑-PROGRAM I

Interstate 5 - 236th
Street SW to 164th Street SW HOV - Construction

Appropriation:

Motor Vehicle Account‑-State.................... $ 38,000

Prior Biennia
(Expenditures).................... $ 0

Future Biennia
(Projected Costs)................ $ 939,000

TOTAL.................................... $ 977,000

NEW SECTION. Sec.
425. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF
TRANSPORTATION‑-IMPROVEMENTS‑-PROGRAM I

Interstate 5 -
Interurban Trail Crossing of SR 524 - Design, Right of Way, and Construction

Appropriation:

Motor Vehicle Account‑-State.................... $ 237,000

Prior Biennia
(Expenditures).................... $ 0

Future Biennia
(Projected Costs)................ $ 2,866,000

TOTAL.................................... $ 3,103,000

NEW SECTION. Sec.
426. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF
TRANSPORTATION‑-IMPROVEMENTS‑-PROGRAM I

Interstate 5 - 196th
Street SW (SR 524) Interchange, Phase C - Right of Way and Construction

Appropriation:

Motor Vehicle Account‑-State.................... $ 1,667,000

Prior Biennia
(Expenditures).................... $ 0

Future Biennia
(Projected Costs)................ $ 18,695,000

TOTAL.................................... $ 20,362,000

NEW SECTION. Sec.
427. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF
TRANSPORTATION‑-IMPROVEMENTS‑-PROGRAM I

Interstate 5 - SR 526
to US 2, Add HOV Lanes - Design, Right of Way, and Construction

Appropriation:

Motor Vehicle Account‑-State.................... $ 3,988,000

Prior Biennia
(Expenditures).................... $ 0

Future Biennia
(Projected Costs)................ $ 154,285,000

TOTAL.................................... $ 158,273,000

NEW SECTION. Sec.
428. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF
TRANSPORTATION‑-IMPROVEMENTS‑-PROGRAM I

Interstate 5 - North of
SR 2 Interchange, Noise Walls - Design and Construction

Appropriation:

Motor Vehicle Account‑-State.................... $ 60,000

Prior Biennia
(Expenditures).................... $ 0

Future Biennia
(Projected Costs)................ $ 838,000

TOTAL.................................... $ 898,000

NEW SECTION. Sec.
429. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF
TRANSPORTATION‑-IMPROVEMENTS‑-PROGRAM I

Interstate 5 - Mt.
Vernon, Bellingham, and Marysville, Traffic Systems - Design and Construction

Appropriation:

Motor Vehicle Account‑-State....... ............ $ 85,000

Prior Biennia
(Expenditures).................... $ 0

Future Biennia
(Projected Costs)................ $ 976,000

TOTAL.................................... $ 1,061,000

NEW SECTION. Sec.
430. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF
TRANSPORTATION‑-IMPROVEMENTS‑-PROGRAM I

Interstate 5 - 172nd
Street NE (SR 531) Interchange - Right of Way and Construction

Appropriation:

Motor Vehicle Account‑-State.................... $ 1,064,000

Prior Biennia
(Expenditures).................... $ 0

Future Biennia
(Projected Costs)................ $ 9,576,000

TOTAL.................................... $ 10,640,000

NEW SECTION. Sec.
431. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF
TRANSPORTATION‑-IMPROVEMENTS‑-PROGRAM I

Interstate 5 - South
End of SR 536 Interchange, Noise Walls - Design and Construction

Appropriation:

Motor Vehicle Account‑-State.................... $ 57,000

Prior Biennia
(Expenditures).................... $ 0

Future Biennia
(Projected Costs)................ $ 1,023,000

TOTAL.................................... $ 1,080,000

NEW SECTION. Sec.
432. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF
TRANSPORTATION‑-IMPROVEMENTS‑-PROGRAM I

Interstate 5 - 2nd
Street Bridge Replacement - Construction

Appropriation:

Motor Vehicle Account‑-State.................... $ 467,000

Prior Biennia
(Expenditures).................... $ 0

Future Biennia
(Projected Costs)................ $ 7,872,000

TOTAL.................................... $ 8,339,000

NEW SECTION. Sec.
433. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF
TRANSPORTATION‑-IMPROVEMENTS‑-PROGRAM I

Interstate 5 - Bybee
Creek Fish Barrier Removal - Design and Construction

Appropriation:

Motor Vehicle Account‑-State.................... $ 0

Prior Biennia
(Expenditures)....... ............ $ 0

Future Biennia
(Projected Costs)................ $ 1,092,000

TOTAL.................................... $ 1,092,000

NEW SECTION. Sec.
434. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF
TRANSPORTATION‑-IMPROVEMENTS‑-PROGRAM I

Interstate 5 - Salmon
Creek to I-205 Widening - Construction

Appropriation:

Motor Vehicle Account‑-State.................... $ 10,000,000

Prior Biennia
(Expenditures).................... $ 0

Future Biennia
(Projected Costs)................ $ 20,000,000

TOTAL.................................... $ 30,000,000

NEW SECTION. Sec.
435. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF
TRANSPORTATION‑-IMPROVEMENTS‑-PROGRAM I

Interstate 5 - Rush
Road to Grand Mound Vicinity - Design, Right of Way, and Construction

Appropriation:

Motor Vehicle Account‑-State.................... $ 1,372,000

Prior Biennia
(Expenditures).................... $ 0

Future Biennia
(Projected Costs)................ $ 104,449,000

TOTAL.................................... $ 105,821,000

NEW SECTION. Sec.
436. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF
TRANSPORTATION‑-IMPROVEMENTS‑-PROGRAM I

Interstate 5 - Grand Mound
to Maytown, Widening - Construction

Appropriation:

Motor Vehicle Account‑-State.................... $ 0

Prior Biennia
(Expenditures).................... $ 0

Future Biennia
(Projected Costs)................ $ 33,530,000

TOTAL.................................... $ 33,530,000

NEW SECTION. Sec.
437. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF
TRANSPORTATION‑-IMPROVEMENTS‑-PROGRAM I

Interstate 5 - State
Route 502 Interchange - Design and Right of Way

Appropriation:

Motor Vehicle Account‑-State.................... $ 1,733,000

Prior Biennia
(Expenditures).................... $ 0

Future Biennia
(Projected Costs)................ $ 8,431,000

TOTAL.................................... $ 10,164,000

NEW SECTION. Sec.
438. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF
TRANSPORTATION‑-IMPROVEMENTS‑-PROGRAM I

State Route 6 -
Railroad Bridge to Rock Creek Bridge - Design and Right of Way

Appropriation:

Motor Vehicle Account‑-State.................... $ 1,050,000

Prior Biennia
(Expenditures).................... $ 483,514

Future Biennia
(Projected Costs)................ $ 899,000

TOTAL.................................... $ 2,432,514

NEW SECTION. Sec.
439. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF
TRANSPORTATION‑-IMPROVEMENTS‑-PROGRAM I

State Route 7 - State
Route 507 to State Route 512, Safety - Construction

Appropriation:

Motor Vehicle Account‑-State.................... $ 0

Prior Biennia
(Expenditures).................... $ 0

Future Biennia
(Projected Costs)................ $ 9,664,000

TOTAL.................................... $ 9,664,000

NEW SECTION. Sec.
440. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF
TRANSPORTATION‑-IMPROVEMENTS‑-PROGRAM I

State Route 9 - 212th
Street SE to 176th Street SE - Design and Right of Way

Appropriation:

Motor Vehicle Account‑-State.................... $ 474,000

Prior Biennia
(Expenditures).................... $ 0

Future Biennia
(Projected Costs)................ $ 4,954,000

TOTAL.................................... $ 5,428,000

NEW SECTION. Sec.
441. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF
TRANSPORTATION‑-IMPROVEMENTS‑-PROGRAM I

State Route 9 - 56th
Street SE and 42nd Street NE, Safety - Construction

Appropriation:

Motor Vehicle Account‑-State.................... $ 0

Prior Biennia
(Expenditures)........... ........ $ 0

Future Biennia
(Projected Costs)................ $ 1,841,000

TOTAL.................................... $ 1,841,000

NEW SECTION. Sec.
442. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF
TRANSPORTATION‑-IMPROVEMENTS‑-PROGRAM I

State Route 9 - Prairie
Road to Thunder Creek - Construction

Appropriation:

Motor Vehicle Account‑-State.................... $ 0

Prior Biennia
(Expenditures).................... $ 0

Future Biennia
(Projected Costs)................ $ 3,332,000

TOTAL.................................... $ 3,332,000

NEW SECTION. Sec.
443. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF
TRANSPORTATION‑-IMPROVEMENTS‑-PROGRAM I

State Route 9 -
Nooksack Road Vicinity to Cherry Street, All Weather Road - Right of Way and
Construction

Appropriation:

Motor Vehicle Account‑-State.................... $ 801,000

Prior Biennia
(Expenditures).................... $ 0

Future Biennia
(Projected Costs)................ $ 11,728,000

TOTAL.................................... $ 12,529,000

NEW SECTION. Sec.
444. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF
TRANSPORTATION‑-IMPROVEMENTS‑-PROGRAM I

US 12 - Old Naches
Highway Interchange - Design

Appropriation:

Motor Vehicle Account‑-State.................... $ 223,000

Prior Biennia
(Expenditures).................... $ 0

Future Biennia
(Projected Costs)................ $ 377,000

TOTAL.................................... $ 600,000

NEW SECTION. Sec.
445. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF
TRANSPORTATION‑-IMPROVEMENTS‑-PROGRAM I

US 12 - Attalia
Vicinity, Add Lanes - Design, Right of Way, and Construction

Appropriation:

Motor Vehicle Account‑-State.................... $ 133,000

Prior Biennia
(Expenditures).................... $ 0

Future Biennia
(Projected Costs)................ $ 8,253,000

TOTAL.................................... $ 8,386,000

NEW SECTION. Sec.
446. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF
TRANSPORTATION‑-IMPROVEMENTS‑-PROGRAM I

US 12 - Attalia
Vicinity to SR 730, Add Lanes - Design and Right of Way

Appropriation:

Motor Vehicle Account‑-State.................... $ 250,000

Prior Biennia
(Expenditures).................... $ 0

Future Biennia
(Projected Costs)................ $ 1,778,000

TOTAL.................................... $ 2,028,000

NEW SECTION. Sec.
447. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF
TRANSPORTATION‑-IMPROVEMENTS‑-PROGRAM I

State Route 14 -
Maryhill Spur Vicinity to US 97, Add Truck Climbing Lane - Design, Right of
Way, and Construction

Appropriation:

Motor Vehicle Account‑-State.................... $ 75,000

Prior Biennia
(Expenditures).................... $ 88,201

Future Biennia
(Projected Costs)................ $ 1,143,000

TOTAL.................................... $ 1,306,201

NEW SECTION. Sec.
448. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF
TRANSPORTATION‑-IMPROVEMENTS‑-PROGRAM I

State Route 14 -
Camas/Washougal Vicinity, Widening - Design, Right of Way, and Construction

Appropriation:

Motor Vehicle Account‑-State.................... $ 1,615,000

Prior Biennia
(Expenditures).................... $ 933,559

Future Biennia
(Projected Costs)................ $ 29,615,000

TOTAL.................................... $ 32,163,559

NEW SECTION. Sec.
449. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF
TRANSPORTATION‑-IMPROVEMENTS‑-PROGRAM I

State Route 16 - I-5 to
Tacoma Narrows Bridge, Add HOV Lanes - Design and Construction

Appropriation:

Motor Vehicle Account‑-State.................... $ 8,109,000

Prior Biennia
(Expenditures).................... $ 0

Future Biennia
(Projected Costs)................ $ 77,175,000

TOTAL.................................... $ 85,284,000

NEW SECTION. Sec.
450. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF
TRANSPORTATION‑-IMPROVEMENTS‑-PROGRAM I

State Route 16 -
Olympic I/C to Purdy I/C, Add HOV Lanes - Design

Appropriation:

Motor Vehicle Account‑-State.................... $ 0

Prior Biennia
(Expenditures).................... $ 0

Future Biennia
(Projected Costs)................ $ 1,300,000

TOTAL.................................... $ 1,300,000

NEW SECTION. Sec.
451. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF
TRANSPORTATION‑-IMPROVEMENTS‑-PROGRAM I

State Route 16 - Gig
Harbor New Interchange - Construction

Appropriation:

Motor Vehicle Account‑-State.................... $ 0

Prior Biennia
(Expenditures).................... $ 0

Future Biennia
(Projected Costs)................ $ 2,966,000

TOTAL.................................... $ 2,966,000

NEW SECTION. Sec.
452. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF
TRANSPORTATION‑-IMPROVEMENTS‑-PROGRAM I

State Route 16 -
Burley/Olalla Intersection Safety - Construction

Appropriation:

Motor Vehicle Account‑-State.................... $ 242,000

Prior Biennia
(Expenditures).................... $ 0

Future Biennia
(Projected Costs)................ $ 287,000

TOTAL.................................... $ 529,000

NEW SECTION. Sec.
453. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF
TRANSPORTATION‑-IMPROVEMENTS‑-PROGRAM I

State Route 16 - 36th
Street to Olympic Drive NW, Add HOV Lanes - Construction

Appropriation:

Motor Vehicle Account‑-State.................... $ 1,629,000

Prior Biennia
(Expenditures).................... $ 0

Future Biennia
(Projected Costs)................ $ 6,510,000

TOTAL.................................... $ 8,139,000

NEW SECTION. Sec.
454. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF
TRANSPORTATION‑-IMPROVEMENTS‑-PROGRAM I

State Route 17 -
Pioneer Way to Stratford Road - Construction

Appropriation:

Motor Vehicle Account‑-State.................... $ 0

Prior Biennia
(Expenditures).................... $ 0

Future Biennia
(Projected Costs)................ $ 14,744,000

TOTAL.................................... $ 14,744,000

NEW SECTION. Sec.
455. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF
TRANSPORTATION‑-IMPROVEMENTS‑-PROGRAM I

State Route 18 -
Complete Corridor Expansion to Four Lane Freeway - Design, Right of Way, and
Construction

The appropriation in
this section is provided for the design, right of way, and construction phases
of the following projects along the SR 18 corridor: Covington Way to Maple
Valley; Maple Valley to Issaquah/Hobart Road; Issaquah/Hobart Road to
Tigergate; Tigergate to I‑90.

Appropriation:

Motor Vehicle Account‑-State.................... $ 513,000

Prior Biennia
(Expenditures).................... $ 0

Future Biennia
(Projected Costs)................ $ 140,037,000

TOTAL.................................... $ 140,550,000

NEW SECTION. Sec.
456. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF
TRANSPORTATION‑-IMPROVEMENTS‑-PROGRAM I

State Route 20 - Mazama
Area, Remove Fish Passage Barrier - Construction

Appropriation:

Motor Vehicle Account‑-State.................... $ 50,000

Prior Biennia
(Expenditures).................... $ 0

Future Biennia
(Projected Costs)................ $ 699,000

TOTAL....................... ............ $ 749,000

NEW SECTION. Sec.
457. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF
TRANSPORTATION‑-IMPROVEMENTS‑-PROGRAM I

State Route 20 -
Deception and Canoe Pass Bridges - Construction

Appropriation:

Motor Vehicle Account‑-State.................... $ 0

Prior Biennia
(Expenditures).................... $ 0

Future Biennia
(Projected Costs)................ $ 8,531,000

TOTAL.................................... $ 8,531,000

NEW SECTION. Sec.
458. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF
TRANSPORTATION‑-IMPROVEMENTS‑-PROGRAM I

State Route 20 -
Fredonia to I-5 Widening - Right of Way

Appropriation:

Motor Vehicle Account‑-State.................... $ 1,775,000

Prior Biennia
(Expenditures).................... $ 0

Future Biennia
(Projected Costs)................ $ 2,725,000

TOTAL.................................... $ 4,500,000

NEW SECTION. Sec.
459. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF
TRANSPORTATION‑-IMPROVEMENTS‑-PROGRAM I

State Route 22 - I‑82
to McDonald Road, Safety - Design, Right of Way, and Construction

Appropriation:

Motor Vehicle Account‑-State.................... $ 207,000

Prior Biennia
(Expenditures).................... $ 15,852

Future Biennia
(Projected Costs)................ $ 5,414,000

TOTAL.................................... $ 5,636,852

NEW SECTION. Sec.
460. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF
TRANSPORTATION‑-IMPROVEMENTS‑-PROGRAM I

State Route 24 - I‑82
to Keys Road - Construction

Appropriation:

Motor Vehicle Account‑-State.................... $ 0

Prior Biennia
(Expenditures).................... $ 0

Future Biennia
(Projected Costs)................ $ 10,776,000

TOTAL.................................... $ 10,776,000

NEW SECTION. Sec.
461. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF
TRANSPORTATION‑-IMPROVEMENTS‑-PROGRAM I

State Route 28 -
Junction US 2/97 to 9th Street - Design and Right of Way

Appropriation:

Motor Vehicle Account‑-State.................... $ 4,195,000

Prior Biennia
(Expenditures).................... $ 0

Future Biennia (Projected
Costs)................ $ 10,150,000

TOTAL.................................... $ 14,345,000

NEW SECTION. Sec.
462. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF
TRANSPORTATION‑-IMPROVEMENTS‑-PROGRAM I

State Route 28 - Soap
Lake Area, Safety Improvements - Right of Way and Construction

Appropriation:

Motor Vehicle Account‑-State.................... $ 83,000

Prior Biennia
(Expenditures).................... $ 0

Future Biennia
(Projected Costs)................ $ 1,734,000

TOTAL.................................... $ 1,817,000

NEW SECTION. Sec.
463. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF
TRANSPORTATION‑-IMPROVEMENTS‑-PROGRAM I

State Route 31 -
Metaline Falls to International Border, Roadway Improvements - Right of Way and
Construction

Appropriation:

Motor Vehicle Account‑-State.................... $ 3,938,000

Prior Biennia
(Expenditures).................... $ 0

Future Biennia
(Projected Costs)................ $ 6,470,000

TOTAL.................................... $ 10,408,000

NEW SECTION. Sec.
464. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF
TRANSPORTATION‑-IMPROVEMENTS‑-PROGRAM I

Interstate 82 - Thrall
Road to Manatash Ridge - Design

Appropriation:

Motor Vehicle Account‑-State.................... $ 600,000

Prior Biennia
(Expenditures).................... $ 0

Future Biennia
(Projected Costs)................ $ 500,000

TOTAL.................................... $ 1,100,000

NEW SECTION. Sec.
465. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF
TRANSPORTATION‑-IMPROVEMENTS‑-PROGRAM I

Interstate 82 - Yakima
Vicinity, Add Lanes - Design and Construction

Appropriation:

Motor Vehicle Account‑-State.................... $ 500,000

Prior Biennia
(Expenditures).................... $ 0

Future Biennia
(Projected Costs)................ $ 2,973,000

TOTAL.................................... $ 3,473,000

NEW SECTION. Sec.
466. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF
TRANSPORTATION‑-IMPROVEMENTS‑-PROGRAM I

Interstate 90 ‑
Ryegrass Summit to Vantage, Truck Climbing Lane ‑ Construction

Appropriation:

Motor Vehicle Account‑-State.................... $ 10,526,000

Prior Biennia
(Expenditures).................... $ 0

Future Biennia
(Projected Costs)................ $ 0

TOTAL.................................... $ 10,526,000

NEW SECTION. Sec.
467. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF
TRANSPORTATION‑-IMPROVEMENTS‑-PROGRAM I

Interstate 90 ‑
Moses Lake Area, Increase Vertical Bridge Clearance - Right of Way and
Construction

Appropriation:

Motor Vehicle Account‑-State.................... $ 1,511,000

Prior Biennia
(Expenditures).................... $ 0

Future Biennia
(Projected Costs)................ $ 2,603,000

TOTAL.................................... $ 4,114,000

NEW SECTION. Sec.
468. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF
TRANSPORTATION‑-IMPROVEMENTS‑-PROGRAM I

Interstate 90 ‑
Highpoint to Preston, New Trail - Construction

Appropriation:

Motor Vehicle Account‑-State.................... $ 300,000

Prior Biennia
(Expenditures).................... $ 0

Future Biennia
(Projected Costs)................ $ 1,350,000

TOTAL.................................... $ 1,650,000

NEW SECTION. Sec.
469. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF
TRANSPORTATION‑-IMPROVEMENTS‑-PROGRAM I

Interstate 90 ‑
Harvard Road Interchange Improvements - Design, Right of Way, and Construction

Appropriation:

Motor Vehicle Account‑-State.................... $ 0

Prior Biennia
(Expenditures).................... $ 0

Future Biennia
(Projected Costs)................ $ 12,925,000

TOTAL.................................... $ 12,925,000

NEW SECTION. Sec.
470. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF
TRANSPORTATION‑-IMPROVEMENTS‑-PROGRAM I

Interstate 90 ‑
Argonne Road to Pines Road, Widening - Construction

Appropriation:

Motor Vehicle Account‑-State.................... $ 5,000,000

Prior Biennia
(Expenditures).................... $ 0

Future Biennia
(Projected Costs)................ $ 11,553,000

TOTAL.................................... $ 16,553,000

NEW SECTION. Sec.
471. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF
TRANSPORTATION‑-IMPROVEMENTS‑-PROGRAM I

Interstate 90 ‑
Pines Road to Sullivan Road, Widening - Construction

Appropriation:

Motor Vehicle Account‑-State.................... $ 5,000,000

Prior Biennia
(Expenditures).................... $ 0

Future Biennia
(Projected Costs)................ $ 11,553,000

TOTAL.................................... $ 16,553,000

NEW SECTION. Sec.
472. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF
TRANSPORTATION‑-IMPROVEMENTS‑-PROGRAM I

Interstate 90 ‑
Snoqualmie Pass East Improvements - Design and Construction

Appropriation:

Motor Vehicle Account‑-State.................... $ 12,000,000

Prior Biennia
(Expenditures).................... $ 0

Future Biennia
(Projected Costs)................ $ 263,453,000

TOTAL.................................... $ 275,453,000

NEW SECTION. Sec.
473. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF
TRANSPORTATION‑-IMPROVEMENTS‑-PROGRAM I

Interstate 90 ‑
Highline Canal to Elk Heights, Truck Climbing Lane ‑ Construction

Appropriation:

Motor Vehicle Account‑-State.................... $ 4,292,000

Prior Biennia
(Expenditures).................... $ 0

Future Biennia
(Projected Costs)................ $ 0

TOTAL.................................... $ 4,292,000

NEW SECTION. Sec.
474. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF
TRANSPORTATION‑-IMPROVEMENTS‑-PROGRAM I

State Route 96 -
Seattle Hill Road to State Route 9, New Alignment - Right of Way and
Construction

Appropriation:

Motor Vehicle Account‑-State.................... $ 998,000

Prior Biennia
(Expenditures).................... $ 0

Future Biennia
(Projected Costs)................ $ 9,131,000

TOTAL........ ........................... $ 10,129,000

NEW SECTION. Sec.
475. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF
TRANSPORTATION‑-IMPROVEMENTS‑-PROGRAM I

State Route 99 - Aurora
Avenue N. Corridor Project - Construction

Appropriation:

Motor Vehicle Account‑-State.................... $ 2,727,000

Prior Biennia
(Expenditures).................... $ 0

Future Biennia
(Projected Costs)................ $ 2,273,000

TOTAL.................................... $ 5,000,000

NEW SECTION. Sec.
476. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF
TRANSPORTATION‑-IMPROVEMENTS‑-PROGRAM I

US 101 - Dawley Road
Vicinity to Blyn Highway, Truck Climbing Lane ‑ Construction

Appropriation:

Motor Vehicle Account‑-State.................... $ 1,341,000

Prior Biennia
(Expenditures).................... $ 0

Future Biennia
(Projected Costs)................ $ 0

TOTAL.................................... $ 1,341,000

NEW SECTION. Sec.
477. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF
TRANSPORTATION‑-IMPROVEMENTS‑-PROGRAM I

US 101 - Blyn Vicinity
Passing Lanes - Construction

Appropriation:

Motor Vehicle Account‑-State.................... $ 834,000

Prior Biennia
(Expenditures)....... ............ $ 0

Future Biennia
(Projected Costs)................ $ 584,000

TOTAL.................................... $ 1,418,000

NEW SECTION. Sec.
478. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF
TRANSPORTATION‑-IMPROVEMENTS‑-PROGRAM I

US 101 - Gardiner
Vicinity, Truck Climbing Lane - Design and Construction

Appropriation:

Motor Vehicle Account‑-State.................... $ 323,000

Prior Biennia
(Expenditures).................... $ 0

Future Biennia
(Projected Costs)................ $ 1,328,000

TOTAL.................................... $ 1,651,000

NEW SECTION. Sec.
479. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF
TRANSPORTATION‑-IMPROVEMENTS‑-PROGRAM I

State Route 104 - SR 19
Westbound, Passing Lane - Construction

Appropriation:

Motor Vehicle Account‑-State.................... $ 1,060,000

Prior Biennia
(Expenditures).................... $ 0

Future Biennia
(Projected Costs)................ $ 180,000

TOTAL.................................... $ 1,240,000

NEW SECTION. Sec.
480. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF
TRANSPORTATION‑-IMPROVEMENTS‑-PROGRAM I

State Route 106 ‑
Skobob Creek, Fish Passage Barrier Removal ‑ Design and Construction

Appropriation:

Motor Vehicle Account‑-State.................... $ 82,000

Prior Biennia
(Expenditures).................... $ 0

Future Biennia
(Projected Costs)................ $ 1,134,000

TOTAL.................................... $ 1,216,000

NEW SECTION. Sec.
481. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF
TRANSPORTATION‑-IMPROVEMENTS‑-PROGRAM I

State Route 112 ‑
Hoko-Ozette Road, Safety - Construction

Appropriation:

Motor Vehicle Account‑-State.................... $ 0

Prior Biennia
(Expenditures).................... $ 0

Future Biennia
(Projected Costs)................ $ 969,000

TOTAL.................................... $ 969,000

NEW SECTION. Sec.
482. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF
TRANSPORTATION‑-IMPROVEMENTS‑-PROGRAM I

State Route 129 ‑
Clarkston Vicinity, Safety Improvements - Design, Right of Way, and
Construction

Appropriation:

Motor Vehicle Account‑-State.................... $ 789,000

Prior Biennia
(Expenditures).................... $ 0

Future Biennia
(Projected Costs)................ $ 345,000

TOTAL.................................... $ 1,134,000

NEW SECTION. Sec.
483. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF
TRANSPORTATION‑-IMPROVEMENTS‑-PROGRAM I

State Route 160 ‑
SR 16 to Longlake Road Vicinity, Safety Improvements - Construction

Appropriation:

Motor Vehicle Account‑-State.................... $ 344,000

Prior Biennia
(Expenditures).................... $ 0

Future Biennia
(Projected Costs)................ $ 1,656,000

TOTAL.................................... $ 2,000,000

NEW SECTION. Sec.
484. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF
TRANSPORTATION‑-IMPROVEMENTS‑-PROGRAM I

State Route 161 ‑
204th Street to 176th Street, Add Lanes - Construction

Appropriation:

Motor Vehicle Account‑-State.................... $ 0

Prior Biennia
(Expenditures).................... $ 0

Future Biennia
(Projected Costs)................ $ 9,780,000

TOTAL.................................... $ 9,780,000

NEW SECTION. Sec.
485. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF
TRANSPORTATION‑-IMPROVEMENTS‑-PROGRAM I

State Route 161 ‑
128th Street to 176th Street, Safety Improvements - Construction

Appropriation:

Motor Vehicle Account‑-State.................... $ 87,000

Prior Biennia
(Expenditures).................... $ 0

Future Biennia
(Projected Costs)................ $ 7,283,000

TOTAL.................................... $ 7,370,000

NEW SECTION. Sec.
486. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF
TRANSPORTATION‑-IMPROVEMENTS‑-PROGRAM I

State Route 161 ‑
SR 167 Eastbound Ramp, Safety Improvements - Construction

Appropriation:

Motor Vehicle Account‑-State.................... $ 362,000

Prior Biennia
(Expenditures).................... $ 0

Future Biennia
(Projected Costs)................ $ 1,444,000

TOTAL.................................... $ 1,806,000

NEW SECTION. Sec.
487. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF
TRANSPORTATION‑-IMPROVEMENTS‑-PROGRAM I

State Route 161 ‑
36th to Jovita, Widening - Design, Right of Way, and Construction

Appropriation:

Motor Vehicle Account‑-State.................... $ 1,996,000

Prior Biennia
(Expenditures).................... $ 2,115,325

Future Biennia
(Projected Costs)................ $ 16,244,000

TOTAL.................................... $ 20,355,325

NEW SECTION. Sec.
488. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF
TRANSPORTATION‑-IMPROVEMENTS‑-PROGRAM I

State Route 161 ‑
Jovita Boulevard to S. 360th Street, Widening - Right of Way and Construction

Appropriation:

Motor Vehicle Account‑-State.................... $ 1,113,000

Prior Biennia
(Expenditures).................... $ 0

Future Biennia
(Projected Costs)................ $ 15,264,000

TOTAL.................................... $ 16,377,000

NEW SECTION. Sec.
489. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF
TRANSPORTATION‑-IMPROVEMENTS‑-PROGRAM I

State Route 167 ‑
State Route 509 to Interstate 5, New Freeway - Design, Right of Way, and
Construction

Appropriation:

Motor Vehicle Account‑-State.................... $ 28,770,000

Prior Biennia
(Expenditures).................... $ 0

Future Biennia
(Projected Costs)................ $ 307,674,000

TOTAL.................................... $ 336,444,000

NEW SECTION. Sec.
490. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF
TRANSPORTATION‑-IMPROVEMENTS‑-PROGRAM I

State Route 167 ‑
15th Street SW to 15th Street NW, Add HOV Lanes - Design and Construction

Appropriation:

Motor Vehicle Account‑-State.................... $ 3,139,000

Prior Biennia
(Expenditures).................... $ 0

Future Biennia
(Projected Costs)................ $ 34,507,000

TOTAL.................................... $ 37,646,000

NEW SECTION. Sec.
491. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF
TRANSPORTATION‑-IMPROVEMENTS‑-PROGRAM I

State Route 167 ‑
15th Street NW to 84th Avenue S, Complete HOV Project - Design and Construction

Appropriation:

Motor Vehicle Account‑-State.................... $ 86,000

Prior Biennia
(Expenditures).................... $ 907,378

Future Biennia
(Projected Costs)................ $ 869,000

TOTAL.................................... $ 1,862,378

NEW SECTION. Sec.
492. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF
TRANSPORTATION‑-IMPROVEMENTS‑-PROGRAM I

State Route 167 ‑
Interstate 5 to State Route 161, New Freeway ‑ Design and Right of Way

Appropriation:

Motor Vehicle Account‑-State.................... $ 0

Prior Biennia
(Expenditures).................... $ 0

Future Biennia
(Projected Costs)................ $ 78,609,000

TOTAL.................................... $ 78,609,000

NEW SECTION. Sec.
493. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF
TRANSPORTATION‑-IMPROVEMENTS‑-PROGRAM I

State Route 167 ‑
84th Avenue S to S Grady Way, Complete HOV Project ‑ Design and
Construction

Appropriation:

Motor Vehicle Account‑-State.................... $ 75,000

Prior Biennia
(Expenditures).................... $ 1,013,353

Future Biennia
(Projected Costs)................ $ 1,626,000

TOTAL.................................... $ 2,714,353

NEW SECTION. Sec.
494. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF
TRANSPORTATION‑-IMPROVEMENTS‑-PROGRAM I

State Route 167 ‑
Valley Avenue, New Interchange ‑ Design and Right of Way

Appropriation:

Motor Vehicle Account‑-State.................... $ 0

Prior Biennia
(Expenditures).................... $ 0

Future Biennia
(Projected Costs)................ $ 19,641,000

TOTAL.................................... $ 19,641,000

NEW SECTION. Sec.
495. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF
TRANSPORTATION‑-IMPROVEMENTS‑-PROGRAM I

State Route 167 ‑
SR 512 Interchange to 15th Street SW, Add HOV Lanes ‑ Design and Right of
Way

Appropriation:

Motor Vehicle Account‑-State.................... $ 0

Prior Biennia
(Expenditures).................... $ 0

Future Biennia
(Projected Costs)................ $ 8,680,000

TOTAL.................................... $ 8,680,000

NEW SECTION. Sec.
496. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF
TRANSPORTATION‑-IMPROVEMENTS‑-PROGRAM I

State Route 169 ‑
225th Avenue SE to SE Wax Road ‑ Design and Right of Way

Appropriation:

Motor Vehicle Account‑-State.................... $ 116,000

Prior Biennia
(Expenditures).................... $ 0

Future Biennia
(Projected Costs)................ $ 609,000

TOTAL.................................... $ 725,000

NEW SECTION. Sec.
497. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF
TRANSPORTATION‑-IMPROVEMENTS‑-PROGRAM I

State Route 203 ‑
NE 124th/Novelty Road Vicinity ‑ Construction

Appropriation:

Motor Vehicle Account‑-State.................... $ 146,000

Prior Biennia
(Expenditures).................... $ 0

Future Biennia
(Projected Costs)................ $ 1,110,000

TOTAL.................................... $ 1,256,000

NEW SECTION. Sec.
498. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF
TRANSPORTATION‑-IMPROVEMENTS‑-PROGRAM I

Interstate 205 ‑
SR 14 to 83rd Street Widening ‑ Design and Right of Way

Appropriation:

Motor Vehicle Account‑-State.................... $ 2,000,000

Prior Biennia
(Expenditures).................... $ 0

Future Biennia
(Projected Costs)................ $ 18,000,000

TOTAL.................................... $ 20,000,000

NEW SECTION. Sec.
499. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF
TRANSPORTATION‑-IMPROVEMENTS‑-PROGRAM I

State Route 231 ‑
SR 292 to SR 395, All Weather Road ‑ Design, Right of Way, and
Construction

Appropriation:

Motor Vehicle Account‑-State.................... $ 20,000

Prior Biennia
(Expenditures).................... $ 0

Future Biennia
(Projected Costs)................ $ 12,183,000

TOTAL.................................... $ 12,203,000

NEW SECTION. Sec.
500. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF
TRANSPORTATION‑-IMPROVEMENTS‑-PROGRAM I

State Route 240 ‑
Interstate 182 to Richland Y, Add Lanes ‑ Design, Right of Way, and
Construction

Appropriation:

Motor Vehicle Account‑-State........... ........ $ 2,657,000

Prior Biennia
(Expenditures).................... $ 0

Future Biennia
(Projected Costs)................ $ 18,842,000

TOTAL.................................... $ 21,499,000

NEW SECTION. Sec.
501. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF
TRANSPORTATION‑-IMPROVEMENTS‑-PROGRAM I

State Route 240 ‑
Richland Y to Columbia Center Interchange, Improvements ‑ Design, Right
of Way, and Construction

Appropriation:

Motor Vehicle Account‑-State.................... $ 3,438,000

Prior Biennia
(Expenditures).................... $ 0

Future Biennia
(Projected Costs)................ $ 18,608,000

TOTAL.................................... $ 22,046,000

NEW SECTION. Sec.
502. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF
TRANSPORTATION‑-IMPROVEMENTS‑-PROGRAM I

State Route 241 ‑
North Sunnyside Reconstruction, All Weather Road ‑ Design, Right of Way,
and Construction

Appropriation:

Motor Vehicle Account‑-State.................... $ 972,000

Prior Biennia
(Expenditures).................... $ 0

Future Biennia
(Projected Costs)................ $ 6,302,000

TOTAL.................................... $ 7,274,000

NEW SECTION. Sec.
503. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF
TRANSPORTATION‑-IMPROVEMENTS‑-PROGRAM I

State Route 241 ‑
Rattlesnake Hills to Junction SR 24, All Weather Road ‑ Right of Way and
Construction

Appropriation:

Motor Vehicle Account‑-State.................... $ 2,385,000

Prior Biennia
(Expenditures).................... $ 0

Future Biennia
(Projected Costs)................ $ 2,632,000

TOTAL.................................... $ 5,017,000

NEW SECTION. Sec.
504. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF
TRANSPORTATION‑-IMPROVEMENTS‑-PROGRAM I

State Route 243 ‑
Wanapum North, All Weather Road ‑ Construction

Appropriation:

Motor Vehicle Account‑-State.................... $ 552,000

Prior Biennia
(Expenditures).................... $ 0

Future Biennia
(Projected Costs)................ $ 3,357,000

TOTAL.................................... $ 3,909,000

NEW SECTION. Sec.
505. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF
TRANSPORTATION‑-IMPROVEMENTS‑-PROGRAM I

State Route 270 ‑
Pullman to Idaho State Line, Widen to Four Lane Divided Highway ‑ Right
of Way and Construction

Appropriation:

Motor Vehicle Account‑-State.. ................. $ 1,461,000

Prior Biennia
(Expenditures).................... $ 0

Future Biennia
(Projected Costs)................ $ 19,475,000

TOTAL.................................... $ 20,936,000

NEW SECTION. Sec.
506. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF
TRANSPORTATION‑-IMPROVEMENTS‑-PROGRAM I

State Route 303 ‑
Bremerton to Silverdale, EIS ‑ Design

Appropriation:

Motor Vehicle Account‑-State.................... $ 800,000

Prior Biennia
(Expenditures).................... $ 0

Future Biennia
(Projected Costs)................ $ 0

TOTAL.................................... $ 800,000

NEW SECTION. Sec.
507. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF
TRANSPORTATION‑-IMPROVEMENTS‑-PROGRAM I

State Route 304 ‑
SR 3 to Bremerton Ferry Terminal, Add HOV Lanes ‑ Construction

Appropriation:

Motor Vehicle Account‑-State.................... $ 5,645,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures).................... $ 0

Future Biennia
(Projected Costs)................ $ 5,155,000

TOTAL.................................... $ 10,800,000

NEW SECTION. Sec.
508. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF
TRANSPORTATION‑-IMPROVEMENTS‑-PROGRAM I

State Route 305 ‑
Poulsbo City Limits to Bond Road, Add Lanes ‑ Construction

Appropriation:

Motor Vehicle Account‑-State.................... $ 1,310,000

Prior Biennia
(Expenditures).................... $ 0

Future Biennia
(Projected Costs)................ $ 13,062,000

TOTAL.................................... $ 14,372,000

NEW SECTION. Sec.
509. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF
TRANSPORTATION‑-IMPROVEMENTS‑-PROGRAM I

State Route 307 ‑
State Route 305 to State Route 104, EIS ‑ Design

Appropriation:

Motor Vehicle Account‑-State.................... $ 683,000

Prior Biennia
(Expenditures).................... $ 0

Future Biennia
(Projected Costs)................ $ 2,317,000

TOTAL.................................... $ 3,000,000

NEW SECTION. Sec.
510. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF
TRANSPORTATION‑-IMPROVEMENTS‑-PROGRAM I

US 395 ‑ 19th
Avenue Kennewick, Add Noise Walls ‑ Design and Construction

Appropriation:

Motor Vehicle Account‑-State.................... $ 993,000

Prior Biennia
(Expenditures).................... $ 0

Future Biennia
(Projected Costs)................ $ 2,756,000

TOTAL.................................... $ 3,749,000

NEW SECTION. Sec.
511. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF
TRANSPORTATION‑-IMPROVEMENTS‑-PROGRAM I

US 395 ‑ North
Spokane Corridor, New Freeway ‑ Design, Right of Way, and Construction

The appropriation in
this section is provided for the design, right of way, and construction phases
of the following projects along the US 395 North Spokane corridor: North
Spokane Corridor ‑ Right of Way; NSC Trent Avenue to Francis Avenue ‑
Preconstruction; NSC Spokane River to Francis Avenue ‑ Street
Improvements; NSC Francis Avenue to Hawthorne Road ‑ Preconstruction; NSC
Hawthorne Road to US 2 ‑ Four Lane Divided Highway; NSC US 2 to
Wandermere Vicinity ‑ Four Lane Divided Highway.

Appropriation:

Motor Vehicle Account‑-State.................... $ 41,890,000

Prior Biennia
(Expenditures).................... $ 0

Future Biennia
(Projected Costs)................ $ 273,557,000

TOTAL.................................... $ 315,447,000

NEW SECTION. Sec.
512. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF
TRANSPORTATION‑-IMPROVEMENTS‑-PROGRAM I

Interstate 405 ‑
Tukwila to Lynnwood (Stage 1, Tukwila to Bellevue) ‑ Design, Right of
Way, and Construction

The appropriation in
this section is provided for the design, right of way, and construction costs
necessary to add two general‑purpose lanes in each direction of I-405
from I‑5 in Tukwila to I‑90 in Bellevue plus other capacity
improvements as needed. Funding is also provided to reconstruct the
interchange at SR 167 and complete the design necessary to continue capacity
improvements from I‑90 through Bellevue.

Appropriation:

Motor Vehicle Account‑-State.................... $ 50,000,000

Prior Biennia
(Expenditures).................... $ 0

Future Biennia
(Projected Costs)................ $ 2,143,919,000

TOTAL.................................... $ 2,193,919,000

NEW SECTION. Sec.
513. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF
TRANSPORTATION‑-IMPROVEMENTS‑-PROGRAM I

Interstate 405 ‑
Bothell to Swamp Creek Interchange, Complete HOV Project ‑ Design and
Construction

Appropriation:

Motor Vehicle Account‑-State.................... $ 80,000

Prior Biennia
(Expenditures)................ ... $ 0

Future Biennia
(Projected Costs)................ $ 799,000

TOTAL.................................... $ 879,000

NEW SECTION. Sec.
514. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF
TRANSPORTATION‑-IMPROVEMENTS‑-PROGRAM I

Interstate 405 ‑
NE 44th Interchange, Improvements ‑ Right of Way and Construction

Appropriation:

Motor Vehicle Account‑-State.................... $ 5,999,000

Prior Biennia
(Expenditures).................... $ 0

Future Biennia
(Projected Costs)................ $ 60,410,000

TOTAL.................................... $ 66,409,000

NEW SECTION. Sec.
515. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF
TRANSPORTATION‑-IMPROVEMENTS‑-PROGRAM I

State Route 410 ‑
234th to Hinkleman Extension Road, Add Lanes ‑ Right of Way

Appropriation:

Motor Vehicle Account‑-State.................... $ 1,620,000

Prior Biennia
(Expenditures).................... $ 0

Future Biennia
(Projected Costs)................ $ 5,748,000

TOTAL.................................... $ 7,368,000

NEW SECTION. Sec.
516. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF
TRANSPORTATION‑-IMPROVEMENTS‑-PROGRAM I

State Route 500 ‑
St. Johns Boulevard, New Interchange ‑ Design, Right of Way, and
Construction

Appropriation:

Motor Vehicle Account‑-State.................... $ 1,650,000

Prior Biennia
(Expenditures).................... $ 0

Future Biennia
(Projected Costs)................ $ 20,413,000

TOTAL.................................... $ 22,063,000

NEW SECTION. Sec.
517. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF
TRANSPORTATION‑-IMPROVEMENTS‑-PROGRAM I

State Route 500 ‑
NE 112th Avenue, New Interchange ‑ Construction

Appropriation:

Motor Vehicle Account‑-State.................... $ 11,536,000

Prior Biennia
(Expenditures).. ................. $ 0

Future Biennia
(Projected Costs)................ $ 10,464,000

TOTAL.................................... $ 22,000,000

NEW SECTION. Sec.
518. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF
TRANSPORTATION‑-IMPROVEMENTS‑-PROGRAM I

State Route 500 ‑
124th Avenue, Safety Improvements ‑ Construction

Appropriation:

Motor Vehicle Account‑-State.................... $ 0

Prior Biennia
(Expenditures).................... $ 0

Future Biennia
(Projected Costs)................ $ 821,000

TOTAL.................................... $ 821,000

NEW SECTION. Sec.
519. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF
TRANSPORTATION‑-IMPROVEMENTS‑-PROGRAM I

State Route 500 ‑
Ward Road to 162nd Avenue, Widening ‑ Construction

Appropriation:

Motor Vehicle Account‑-State.................... $ 0

Prior Biennia
(Expenditures).................... $ 0

Future Biennia
(Projected Costs)................ $ 1,271,000

TOTAL.................................... $ 1,271,000

NEW SECTION. Sec.
520. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF
TRANSPORTATION‑-IMPROVEMENTS‑-PROGRAM I

State Route 501 ‑
19th Avenue Signal ‑ Construction

Appropriation:

Motor Vehicle Account‑-State.................... $ 0

Prior Biennia
(Expenditures).................... $ 0

Future Biennia
(Projected Costs)................ $ 975,000

TOTAL.................................... $ 975,000

NEW SECTION. Sec.
521. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF
TRANSPORTATION‑-IMPROVEMENTS‑-PROGRAM I

State Route 503 ‑
NE 144th to Brush Prairie, Stormwater Improvements ‑ Design, Right of
Way, and Construction

Appropriation:

Motor Vehicle Account‑-State.................... $ 0

Prior Biennia
(Expenditures).................... $ 0

Future Biennia
(Projected Costs)................ $ 824,000

TOTAL.................................... $ 824,000

NEW SECTION. Sec.
522. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF
TRANSPORTATION‑-IMPROVEMENTS‑-PROGRAM I

State Route 503 ‑
Lewisville Park Climbing Lane ‑ Design and Right of Way

Appropriation:

Motor Vehicle Account‑-State.................... $ 100,000

Prior Biennia
(Expenditures).................... $ 247,733

Future Biennia
(Projected Costs)................ $ 500,000

TOTAL.................................... $ 847,733

NEW SECTION. Sec.
523. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF
TRANSPORTATION‑-IMPROVEMENTS‑-PROGRAM I

State Route 509 ‑
I‑5 to Des Moines Way S and S 188th Street, New Extension ‑ Design,
Right of Way, and Construction

The appropriation in
this section is provided for the design, right of way, and construction phases
necessary to extend the freeway section on State Route 509 from its current
terminus at S 188th Street near SeaTac Airport southeast to intersect
Interstate 5 in the vicinity of S 210th. The new extension will provide a
divided roadway with two general-purpose lanes and one HOV lane in each
direction. The South Access Road will extend south from SeaTac Airport to
intersect with SR 509 extension in the vicinity of S 206th. Improvements to
the local arterial system will be made to accommodate these new corridors and to
improve traffic operations.

Appropriation:

Motor Vehicle Account‑-State.................... $ 29,810,000

Prior Biennia
(Expenditures).................... $ 0

Future Biennia
(Projected Costs)................ $ 465,188,000

TOTAL.................................... $ 494,998,000

NEW SECTION. Sec.
524. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF
TRANSPORTATION‑-IMPROVEMENTS‑-PROGRAM I

State Route 519 -
Intermodal Access Project - Right of Way and Construction

The appropriation in
this section is provided for the design, right of way, and construction phases
necessary to construct intermodal improvements in south Seattle to reduce or
eliminate the conflicts between existing intermodal facilities that serve south
downtown Seattle, and improve State Route 519 through traffic from Interstate 5
and Interstate 90 to the Washington State Ferry and Port of Seattle facilities
along the waterfront.

Appropriation:

Motor Vehicle Account‑-State.................... $ 542,000

Prior Biennia
(Expenditures).................... $ 0

Future Biennia
(Projected Costs)................ $ 36,408,000

TOTAL.................................... $ 36,950,000

NEW SECTION. Sec.
525. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF
TRANSPORTATION‑-IMPROVEMENTS‑-PROGRAM I

State Route 520 -
Seattle to Eastside Communities (Trans-Lake) - Design

The appropriation in
this section is provided for the design phase of the Seattle to Eastside
Communities (Trans-Lake Washington) project. The purpose of the Trans-Lake
Washington project is to improve mobility for people and goods on SR 520 while
minimizing negative impacts to neighborhoods and the environment. An
environmental impact statement will help the project's lead agencies and
committees select a preferred alternative for implementation. Remaining
project costs are to be determined once a preferred alternative is selected.

Appropriation:

Motor Vehicle Account‑-State.................... $ 28,222,000

Prior Biennia
(Expenditures).................... $ 0

Future Biennia
(Projected Costs)................ $ 0

TOTAL.................................... $ 28,222,000

NEW SECTION. Sec.
526. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF
TRANSPORTATION‑-IMPROVEMENTS‑-PROGRAM I

State Route 520 - West
Lake Sammamish Parkway to SR 202, Add Lanes - Design, Right of Way, and
Construction

Appropriation:

Motor Vehicle Account‑-State.................... $ 1,299,000

Prior Biennia
(Expenditures).................... $ 0

Future Biennia
(Projected Costs)................ $ 64,175,000

TOTAL.................................... $ 65,474,000

NEW SECTION. Sec.
527. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF
TRANSPORTATION‑-IMPROVEMENTS‑-PROGRAM I

State Route 522 - I-5
to SR 405 Multimodal Project - Construction

Appropriation:

Motor Vehicle Account‑-State.................... $ 0

Prior Biennia
(Expenditures).................... $ 0

Future Biennia
(Projected Costs)................ $ 5,084,000

TOTAL.................................... $ 5,084,000

NEW SECTION. Sec.
528. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF
TRANSPORTATION‑-IMPROVEMENTS‑-PROGRAM I

State Route 522 - SR 9
to Paradise Lake Road, Widen to Four Lane Divided Highway - Design and
Construction

Appropriation:

Motor Vehicle Account‑-State.................... $ 1,287,000

Prior Biennia
(Expenditures).................... $ 0

Future Biennia
(Projected Costs)................ $ 21,162,000

TOTAL.................................... $ 22,449,000

NEW SECTION. Sec.
529. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF
TRANSPORTATION‑-IMPROVEMENTS‑-PROGRAM I

State Route 522 -
Paradise Lake Road to Snohomish River, Widen to Four Lane Divided Highway -
Design and Construction

Appropriation:

Motor Vehicle Account‑-State.................... $ 448,000

Prior Biennia
(Expenditures).................... $ 0

Future Biennia
(Projected Costs)................ $ 14,050,000

TOTAL.................................... $ 14,498,000

NEW SECTION. Sec.
530. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF
TRANSPORTATION‑-IMPROVEMENTS‑-PROGRAM I

State Route 522 -
Snohomish River Bridge to US 2, Widen to Four Lane Divided Highway - Design and
Right of Way

Appropriation:

Motor Vehicle Account‑-State.................... $ 897,000

Prior Biennia
(Expenditures).................... $ 0

Future Biennia
(Projected Costs)................ $ 4,562,000

TOTAL.................................... $ 5,459,000

NEW SECTION. Sec.
531. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF
TRANSPORTATION‑-IMPROVEMENTS‑-PROGRAM I

State Route 524 - 24th
Avenue SW to SR 527, Add Lanes - Design and Construction

Appropriation:

Motor Vehicle Account‑-State.................... $ 61,000

Prior Biennia
(Expenditures).................... $ 0

Future Biennia
(Projected Costs)................ $ 4,377,000

TOTAL.................................... $ 4,438,000

NEW SECTION. Sec.
532. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF
TRANSPORTATION‑-IMPROVEMENTS‑-PROGRAM I

State Route 527 - 132nd
Street SE to 112th Street SE, Add Lanes - Construction

Appropriation:

Motor Vehicle Account‑-State.................... $ 52,000

Prior Biennia
(Expenditures).................... $ 0

Future Biennia
(Projected Costs)................ $ 17,152,000

TOTAL.................................... $ 17,204,000

NEW SECTION. Sec.
533. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF
TRANSPORTATION‑-IMPROVEMENTS‑-PROGRAM I

State Route 530 -
Jordan Road to 139th Avenue NE, Safety Improvements - Construction

Appropriation:

Motor Vehicle Account‑-State.................... $ 0

Prior Biennia
(Expenditures).................... $ 0

Future Biennia
(Projected Costs)................ $ 806,000

TOTAL.................................... $ 806,000

NEW SECTION. Sec.
534. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF
TRANSPORTATION‑-IMPROVEMENTS‑-PROGRAM I

State Route 530 -
Arlington Heights Road/Jordan Road, Safety Improvements - Construction

Appropriation:

Motor Vehicle Account‑-State.................... $ 0

Prior Biennia
(Expenditures).................... $ 0

Future Biennia
(Projected Costs)................ $ 1,118,000

TOTAL.................................... $ 1,118,000

NEW SECTION. Sec.
535. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF
TRANSPORTATION‑-IMPROVEMENTS‑-PROGRAM I

State Route 530 - Lake
Cavanaugh Road to Montague Creek, All Weather Road - Construction

Appropriation:

Motor Vehicle Account‑-State.................... $ 0

Prior Biennia
(Expenditures).................... $ 0

Future Biennia
(Projected Costs)................ $ 1,558,000

TOTAL.................................... $ 1,558,000

NEW SECTION. Sec.
536. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF
TRANSPORTATION‑-IMPROVEMENTS‑-PROGRAM I

State Route 531 - 43rd
Avenue NE to 67th Avenue NE, Add Lanes - Design and Right of Way

Appropriation:

Motor Vehicle Account‑-State.................... $ 791,000

Prior Biennia
(Expenditures).................... $ 380,852

Future Biennia
(Projected Costs)................ $ 6,119,000

TOTAL................................ ... $ 7,290,852

NEW SECTION. Sec.
537. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF
TRANSPORTATION‑-IMPROVEMENTS‑-PROGRAM I

State Route 539 -
Tenmile Road to International Boundary, Add Lanes - Design, Right of Way, and
Construction

Appropriation:

Motor Vehicle Account‑-State.................... $ 3,869,000

Prior Biennia
(Expenditures).................... $ 0

Future Biennia
(Projected Costs)................ $ 12,539,000

TOTAL.................................... $ 16,408,000

NEW SECTION. Sec.
538. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF
TRANSPORTATION‑-IMPROVEMENTS‑-PROGRAM I

State Route 542 -
Orleans to Britton Road, Add Lanes - Design, Right of Way, and Construction

Appropriation:

Motor Vehicle Account‑-State.................... $ 1,674,000

Prior Biennia
(Expenditures).................... $ 0

Future Biennia
(Projected Costs)....... ........ $ 10,159,000

TOTAL.................................... $ 11,833,000

NEW SECTION. Sec.
539. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF
TRANSPORTATION‑-IMPROVEMENTS‑-PROGRAM I

State Route 543 -
Boblett Street to International Boundary, Widen - Right of Way and Construction

Appropriation:

Motor Vehicle Account‑-State.................... $ 2,263,000

Prior Biennia
(Expenditures).................... $ 271,703

Future Biennia
(Projected Costs)................ $ 20,045,000

TOTAL.................................... $ 22,579,703

NEW SECTION. Sec.
540. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF
TRANSPORTATION‑-IMPROVEMENTS‑-PROGRAM I

State Route 900 - SE
78th Street Vicinity to I-90 Vicinity, Add Lanes - Design, Right of Way, and
Construction

Appropriation:

Motor Vehicle Account‑-State.................... $ 1,407,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures).................... $ 0

Future Biennia
(Projected Costs)................ $ 11,159,000

TOTAL.................................... $ 12,566,000

NEW SECTION. Sec.
541. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF
TRANSPORTATION‑-IMPROVEMENTS‑-PROGRAM I

Statewide
Transportation Projects Totaling Less than $500,000

The appropriation in
this section is provided for the design, right of way, and construction phases
of the following projects:

Northwest region:
I-5/Ship Canal Bridge - noise mitigation; I-5/116th Street NE Vicinity - noise
walls; I-90/West Lake Sammamish Parkway Vicinity - drainage; I-90/Raging River
Vicinity - drainage; SR 169/140th Way SE to SR 900; SR 169/Fifth Avenue SE -
noise walls.

North Central region:
US 2/Dryden - signal; US 2/East Wenatchee Cascade Avenue - signal; US
97/Blewett Pass - truck lane; US 97A/Entiat Park Entrance - turn lanes.

Olympic region: SR
3/NB Off Ramp at Loxie Eagans Boulevard - signalization; SR 3/Spring Creek -
fish passage; I-5/Woodland Creek - stormwater outfall; I-5/Indian Creek - fish
passage; I-5/McAllister Creek - stormwater; SR 7/340th Intersection - safety;
US 101/Corriea Road Vicinity to Zaccardo Road - safety; US 101/Chicken Coop
Creek - fish passage; SR 104/Jct SR 19 Intersection Safety; SR 112/Unnamed
Tributary to Pysht River - fish passage; SR 305/Bjorgen Creek - fish passage.

Southwest region: SR
503 Unnamed Creek Vicinity NE 319th Street - fish passage; SR 504/Vicinity
Estes Road - fish passage; SR 505/Vicinity Nevil Road - fish passage; SR 505/Unnamed
Creek Vicinity Jct SR 504 - fish passage.

South Central region:
SCR Region Wide Bridge Rail Retrofit - safety; SR 124/East Junction SR 12 -
reconstruction; SR 129/Asotin Vicinity - reconstruction; I-182/US 395 I/C -
Roadside Safety; US 395/Kennewick Variable Message Sign - safety; US 395/North
of Pasco - rumble strips.

Eastern region: US
395/Spokane to Stevens County Line - design; US 395/Spokane County Line to
Chewelah - design.

Appropriation:

Motor Vehicle Account‑-State.................... $ 5,200,000

Prior Biennia
(Expenditures).................... $ 0

Future Biennia
(Projected Costs)................ $ 3,688,000

TOTAL.................................... $ 8,888,000

NEW SECTION. Sec.
542. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF
TRANSPORTATION‑-IMPROVEMENTS‑-PROGRAM I

Olympic Region
Environmental Mitigation

Appropriation:

Motor Vehicle Account‑-State.................... $ 0

Prior Biennia
(Expenditures).................... $ 0

Future Biennia
(Projected Costs)................ $ 1,000,000

TOTAL.................................... $ 1,000,000

NEW SECTION. Sec.
543. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF
TRANSPORTATION‑-IMPROVEMENTS‑-PROGRAM I

Transportation
Project: Savings

Projects that are
completed in accordance with section 1005 of this act may have their remaining
funds transferred to this appropriation for other transportation improvement
projects approved by the office of financial management.

Appropriation:

Motor Vehicle Account‑-State.................... $ 1

Prior Biennia
(Expenditures).................... $ 0

Future Biennia
(Projected Costs)................ $ 0

TOTAL.................................... $ 1

NEW SECTION. Sec.
544. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF
TRANSPORTATION‑-IMPROVEMENTS‑-PROGRAM I

Project Delivery System

The appropriation in
this section is provided for the acquisition of a project delivery system for
the highway construction program. At a minimum, the system shall provide
specific project delivery information related to scope, budget, and schedule.

Appropriation:

Motor Vehicle Account‑-State.................... $ 0

Prior Biennia
(Expenditures).................... $ 0

Future Biennia
(Projected Costs)................ $ 2,000,000

TOTAL.................................... $ 2,000,000

NEW SECTION. Sec.
545. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF
TRANSPORTATION‑-IMPROVEMENTS‑-PROGRAM I

Global Positioning
System Training

Appropriation:

Motor Vehicle Account‑-State.................... $ 0

Prior Biennia
(Expenditures).................... $ 0

Future Biennia
(Projected Costs)................ $ 186,000

TOTAL.................................... $ 186,000

NEW SECTION. Sec.
546. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF
TRANSPORTATION‑-IMPROVEMENTS‑-PROGRAM I

Primary Control
Monument Program

Appropriation:

Motor Vehicle Account‑-State.................... $ 106,000

Prior Biennia
(Expenditures).................... $ 0

Future Biennia
(Projected Costs)................ $ 709,000

TOTAL.................................... $ 815,000

NEW SECTION. Sec.
547. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF
TRANSPORTATION‑-IMPROVEMENTS‑-PROGRAM I

Restore Current Law
Projects

The appropriation in
this section is provided for the design, right of way, and construction costs
of 2001‑03 projects that were deferred due to a revenue shortfall in the
current law budget.

Appropriation:

Motor Vehicle Account‑-State.................... $ 33,580,000

Prior Biennia
(Expenditures).................... $ 0

Future Biennia
(Projected Costs)................ $ 0

TOTAL.................................... $ 33,580,000

NEW SECTION. Sec.
548. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF
TRANSPORTATION‑-PRESERVATION‑-PROGRAM
P

Restore Current Law
Projects

The appropriation in
this section is provided for the design, right of way, and construction costs
of 2001‑03 projects that were deferred due to a revenue shortfall in the
current law budget.

Appropriation:

Motor Vehicle Account‑-State.................... $ 10,961,000

Prior Biennia
(Expenditures).................... $ 0

Future Biennia
(Projected Costs)................ $ 0

TOTAL.................................... $ 10,961,000

PART
6

CAPITAL‑-WASHINGTON STATE FERRIES
CONSTRUCTION

The motor vehicle
account‑-state appropriations of $27,421,000 in sections 601 through 607
of this act include $10,000,000 in proceeds from the sale of bonds authorized
by RCW 47.10.843. The transportation commission may authorize the use of
current revenues available to the department of transportation in lieu of bond proceeds
for any part of the state appropriation.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
601. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF
TRANSPORTATION‑-WASHINGTON STATE FERRIES
CONSTRUCTION‑-PROGRAM W

Four Replacement
Auto/Passenger Ferries - Design and Construction

Appropriation:

Motor Vehicle Account‑-State.................... $ 4,128,000

Prior Biennia
(Expenditures).................... $ 0

Future Biennia
(Projected Costs)................ $ 317,761,000

TOTAL.................................... $ 321,889,000

NEW SECTION. Sec.
602. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF
TRANSPORTATION‑-WASHINGTON STATE FERRIES CONSTRUCTION‑-PROGRAM W

Anacortes Multimodal
Terminal - Design, Right of Way, and Construction

Appropriation:

Motor Vehicle Account‑-State.................... $ 518,000

Prior Biennia
(Expenditures).................... $ 0

Future Biennia
(Projected Costs)................ $ 53,842,000

TOTAL.................................... $ 54,360,000

NEW SECTION. Sec.
603. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF
TRANSPORTATION‑-WASHINGTON STATE FERRIES CONSTRUCTION‑-PROGRAM W

Mukilteo Multimodal
Terminal - Design and Right of Way

Appropriation:

Motor Vehicle Account‑-State.................... $ 1,810,000

Prior Biennia
(Expenditures).................... $ 0

Future Biennia
(Projected Costs)................ $ 105,943,000

TOTAL.................................... $ 107,753,000

NEW SECTION. Sec.
604. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF
TRANSPORTATION‑-WASHINGTON STATE FERRIES CONSTRUCTION‑-PROGRAM W

Edmonds Multimodal
Terminal - Design and Right of Way

Appropriation:

Motor Vehicle Account‑-State.................... $ 2,200,000

Prior Biennia
(Expenditures).................... $ 0

Future Biennia
(Projected Costs)................ $ 0

TOTAL.................................... $ 2,200,000

NEW SECTION. Sec.
605. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF
TRANSPORTATION‑-WASHINGTON STATE FERRIES CONSTRUCTION‑-PROGRAM W

Passenger-Only Vessel
and Terminal Projects - Design and Construction

The appropriation in
this section is provided for the acquisition of passenger-only vessels and the
costs associated with the design and construction of passenger-only terminal
facilities necessary to begin passenger-only ferry service on the
Seattle/Kingston route by September 2003 and the Seattle/Southworth route by
September 2005.

Appropriation:

Multimodal
Transportation Account‑-State........ $ 5,716,000

Prior Biennia
(Expenditures).................... $ 0

Future Biennia
(Projected Costs)................ $ 45,541,000

TOTAL.................................... $ 51,256,000

NEW SECTION. Sec.
606. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF
TRANSPORTATION‑-WASHINGTON STATE FERRIES CONSTRUCTION‑-PROGRAM W

Catch-up Preservation
for Terminals and Vessels

The appropriation in
this section is provided for additional terminal and vessel preservation to
reach level recommended by the legislature's joint task force on ferries.

Appropriation:

Motor Vehicle Account‑-State.................... $ 11,690,000

Prior Biennia
(Expenditures).................... $ 0

Future Biennia
(Projected Costs)................ $ 88,310,000

TOTAL.................................... $ 100,000,000

NEW SECTION. Sec.
607. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF
TRANSPORTATION‑-WASHINGTON STATE FERRIES CONSTRUCTION‑-PROGRAM W

Seattle Pier 48
Acquisition/Relocation - Right of Way

Appropriation:

Motor Vehicle Account‑-State.................... $ 7,075,000

Prior Biennia
(Expenditures).................... $ 0

Future Biennia
(Projected Costs)................ $ 1,860,000

TOTAL.................................... $ 8,935,000

PART
7

CAPITAL--RAIL CONSTRUCTION

NEW SECTION. Sec.
701. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF
TRANSPORTATION‑-RAIL‑-PROGRAM Y‑-CAPITAL

Passenger Rail Capital
Improvements - Design, Right of Way, and Construction

The appropriation in
this section is provided for the design, right of way, and construction costs
associated with the following list of passenger rail capital projects:

2001-03 Total Future
Biennia

County Project Amount
Recommended (Projected Costs)

Clark Vancouver Rail Project - incl. 39th St. Bridge 31,803,000 29,172,000

Cowlitz Kelso-Martin Bluff - 3rd mainline 10,460,000 135,286,000

Pierce Point Defiance (Lakeview) Bypass 26,160,000 105,840,000

King Kent-Auburn Valley Improvements 18,013,000 51,987,000

Lewis Napavine Third Mainline 0 32,000,000

Lewis Vadar to Winlock 0 30,000,000

Lewis North Chehalis to Wabash - 3rd mainline 0 45,000,000

Cowlitz Castle Rock - 3rd mainline 0 12,911,000

Snohomish PA Junction to Delta Junction - speed increase 4,000,000 0

Whatcom Bellingham Siding Extension 0 30,000,000

King, Snohomish Capacity Improvements 0 46,000,000

King, Snohomish,

Whatcom High-Speed Upgrades 0 22,171,000

King, Snohomish,

Whatcom Second Round Trip Projects 0 6,793,000

King, Pierce, Lewis,

Cowlitz, Clark Grade Crossing Upgrades 120,000 0

Pierce, Thurston,

Lewis, Cowlitz,

Clark High Speed Crossovers 13,605,000 0

King, Pierce,

Thurston, Lewis,

Cowlitz, Clark High Speed Upgrades 10,399,000 12,000,000

High-Speed Locomotives 12,000,000 72,000,000

New High-Speed Train Sets 18,037,000 125,963,000

Total 134,137,000 757,123,000

Appropriation:

Multimodal
Transportation Account‑-State........ $ 22,400,000

Multimodal
Transportation Account‑-Federal...... $ 111,737,000

Prior Biennia
(Expenditures).................... $ 0

Future Biennia
(Projected Costs)................ $ 757,123,000

TOTAL............. ...................... $ 891,260,000

NEW SECTION. Sec.
702. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF
TRANSPORTATION‑-RAIL‑-PROGRAM Y‑-CAPITAL

Freight Rail Assistance
Program - Design, Right of Way, and Construction

The appropriation in
this section is provided for the design, right of way, and construction costs
associated with the following list of freight rail capital projects:

2001-03 Total Future
Biennia

County Project Amount
Recommended (Projected Costs)

Yakima Yakima County Improvements 300,000 0

Grays Harbor Puget Sound & Pacific Swing Bridge Repairs 1,000,000 0

Skagit Mount Vernon Terminal Log Transload 0 200,000

Lincoln Columbia Basin RR Connell to Warden Upgrade 0 1,000,000

Walla Walla Blue Mtn. RR Wallula to Walla Walla Upgrade 0 1,200,000

Columbia Port of Columbia County - Dayton Upgrades 0 300,000

Grays Harbor Grays Harbor County Saw Mill Spur 0 15,000,000

Benton Port of Benton Industrial Spur Track to Rock Quarry 0 500,000

Grant, Lincoln Palouse R. & Coulee City RR Bridge Repairs 0 500,000

Pierce, Lewis Various 286-Pound Upgrade Projects 0 39,800,000

Pierce, Lewis Tacoma Rail Mtn. Div. Chehalis to Frederickson
Upgrade 0 10,200,000

Pierce, Lewis Tacoma Rail Mtn. Div. Morton Line Repairs 700,000 2,300,000

Total 2,000,000 71,000,000

Appropriation:

Multimodal
Transportation Account‑-State........ $ 2,000,000

Prior Biennia
(Expenditures).................... $ 0

Future Biennia
(Projected Costs)................ $ 71,000,000

TOTAL.................................... $ 73,000,000

NEW SECTION. Sec.
703. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF
TRANSPORTATION‑-RAIL‑-PROGRAM Y‑-CAPITAL

Short Haul Intermodal
Study - Design

Appropriation:

Multimodal
Transportation Account‑-State........ $ 500,000

Prior Biennia
(Expenditures).................... $ 0

Future Biennia
(Projected Costs)................ $ 0

TOTAL.................................... $ 500,000

NEW SECTION. Sec.
704. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF
TRANSPORTATION‑-RAIL‑-PROGRAM Y‑-CAPITAL

Washington Fruit
Express - Design, Right of Way, and Construction

The appropriation in
this section is provided for the design, right of way, and construction of
transload facilities in Wenatchee and Pasco.

Appropriation:

Multimodal
Transportation Account‑-State........ $ 1,000,000

Prior Biennia
(Expenditures).................... $ 0

Future Biennia
(Projected Costs)................ $ 1,000,000

TOTAL.................................... $ 2,000,000

PART
8

CAPITAL‑-LOCAL
PROGRAMS

NEW SECTION. Sec.
801. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF
TRANSPORTATION‑-LOCAL PROGRAMS‑-PROGRAM
Z‑-CAPITAL

Columbia River
Dredging, Washington State Share - Design and Construction

Appropriation:

Multimodal
Transportation Account‑-State........ $ 0

Prior Biennia
(Expenditures).. ................. $ 0

Future Biennia
(Projected Costs)................ $ 17,700,000

TOTAL.................................... $ 17,700,000

NEW SECTION. Sec.
802. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF
TRANSPORTATION‑-LOCAL PROGRAMS‑-PROGRAM Z‑-CAPITAL

School Safety
Enhancements

Appropriation:

Motor Vehicle Account‑-State.................... $ 5,000,000

Prior Biennia
(Expenditures).................... $ 0

Future Biennia
(Projected Costs)................ $ 5,000,000

TOTAL.................................... $ 10,000,000

NEW SECTION. Sec.
803. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF
TRANSPORTATION‑-LOCAL PROGRAMS‑-PROGRAM Z‑-CAPITAL

Main Street Pavement
Program

Appropriation:

Motor Vehicle Account‑-State.................... $ 4,500,000

Prior Biennia
(Expenditures).................... $ 0

Future Biennia
(Projected Costs)................ $ 40,500,000

TOTAL.................................... $ 45,000,000

NEW SECTION. Sec.
804. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF
TRANSPORTATION‑-LOCAL PROGRAMS‑-PROGRAM Z‑-CAPITAL

County Corridor
Congestion Relief

Appropriation:

Motor Vehicle Account‑-State.................... $ 4,500,000

Prior Biennia
(Expenditures).................... $ 0

Future Biennia
(Projected Costs)................ $ 40,500,000

TOTAL.................................... $ 45,000,000

NEW SECTION. Sec.
805. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF
TRANSPORTATION‑-LOCAL PROGRAMS‑-PROGRAM Z‑-CAPITAL

City Corridor
Congestion Relief

Appropriation:

Motor Vehicle Account‑-State.................... $ 4,500,000

Prior Biennia
(Expenditures).................... $ 0

Future Biennia
(Projected Costs)................ $ 40,500,000

TOTAL.................................... $ 45,000,000

NEW SECTION. Sec.
806. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF
TRANSPORTATION‑-LOCAL PROGRAMS‑-PROGRAM Z‑-CAPITAL

Freight mobility
projects as identified by the freight mobility strategic investment board

Appropriation:

Motor Vehicle Account‑-State.................... $ 23,800,000

Prior Biennia
(Expenditures).................... $ 0

Future Biennia
(Projected Costs)................ $ 214,200,000

TOTAL.................................... $ 238,000,000

The appropriations in
this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations: The
motor vehicle account‑-state appropriation of $23,800,000 in this section
includes $20,000,000 in proceeds from the sale of bonds authorized by RCW
47.10.843. The transportation commission may authorize the use of current
revenues available to the department of transportation in lieu of bond proceeds
for any part of the state appropriation.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
807. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF COMMUNITY,
TRADE, AND ECONOMIC DEVELOPMENT

Community Economic
Revitalization (CERB) - Rural Economic Vitality

The appropriation in
this section is provided solely for grants for transportation-related capital
investments that benefit rural economic development. The community economic
revitalization board and the highways and local programs service center at the
department of transportation shall work cooperatively to establish grant
application procedures and project selection criteria.

Appropriation:

Multimodal
Transportation Account‑-State........ $ 5,000,000

Prior Biennia
(Expenditures).................... $ 0

Future Biennia
(Projected Costs)................ $ 45,000,000

TOTAL.................................... $ 50,000,000

PART
9

TRANSFERS AND DISTRIBUTIONS

NEW SECTION. Sec.
901. FOR THE STATE TREASURER‑-BOND RETIREMENT AND
INTEREST AND ONGOING BOND REGISTRATION AND TRANSFER CHARGES: FOR BOND SALES
DISCOUNTS AND DEBT TO BE PAID BY MOTOR VEHICLE FUND AND TRANSPORTATION FUND
REVENUE

Highway Bond Retirement
Account Appropriation........ $........................................... 7,109,000

Motor Vehicle Account‑-State
Appropriation.......... $ 4,130,000

TOTAL.................................... $ 11,239,000

NEW SECTION. Sec.
902. FOR THE STATE TREASURER‑-BOND
RETIREMENT AND INTEREST, AND ONGOING BOND REGISTRATION AND TRANSFER CHARGES:
FOR BOND SALE EXPENSES AND FISCAL AGENT CHARGES

Motor Vehicle Account‑-State
Appropriation.......... $ 340,000

NEW SECTION. Sec.
903. FOR THE STATE TREASURER‑-STATE REVENUES FOR
DISTRIBUTION

Motor Vehicle Account‑-State
Appropriation

for revenue
distribution to the cities.......... $ 7,250,000

Motor Vehicle Account‑-State
Appropriation

for distribution to the
counties... ............ $ 7,250,000

TOTAL.................................... $ 14,500,000

The distributions in
this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations and
specified amounts are provided solely for that activity:

(1) The motor vehicle
account‑-state appropriation to cities is to be distributed in one
distribution in June 2003 consistent with RCW 46.68.110 (4) and (5).
Deductions shall not be made for supervision, studies, or the city hardship
assistance program.

(2) The distribution to
counties shall be distributed in a manner consistent with RCW 46.68.122.
Deductions shall not be made for supervision, studies, or the city hardship
assistance program.

(3) The amounts
provided in this section may not be used to supplant any existing local government
funding for transportation projects or programs. Any local government in
violation of this requirement shall immediately forfeit its eligibility for
future distributions provided under this section.

PART
10

PROVISIONS NECESSARY TO IMPLEMENT
APPROPRIATIONS

NEW SECTION. Sec.
1001. (1) Agencies shall
expedite the expenditure of appropriations in order to: (a) Rehabilitate
transportation infrastructure resources; (b) accelerate transportation related
environmental rehabilitation and restoration projects for the improvement of
the state's natural environment; (c) reduce additional costs associated with
acquisition and construction inflationary pressures; and (d) provide additional
employment opportunities associated with transportation capital expenditures.

(2) In order to meet
the goals of this section, the following conditions apply to the appropriations
of this act: To the extent feasible, agencies are directed to accelerate
expenditures and may use contracted design and construction services wherever
necessary to meet the goals of this section.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
1002. The amounts shown under
the headings "Prior Biennia," "Future Biennia," and
"Total" in this act are for informational purposes only and do not
constitute legislative approval of these amounts.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
1003. (1) Unless otherwise
stated, for all appropriations under this act that require a match of nonstate
money or in-kind contributions, the following requirement, consistent with RCW
43.88.150, shall apply: Expenditures of state money shall be timed so that the
state share of project expenditures never exceeds the intended state share of
total project costs.

(2) Provision of the
full amount of required matching funds is not required to permit the
expenditures of capital budget appropriations for phased projects if a
proportional amount of the required matching funds is provided for each
distinct, identifiable phase of the project.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
1004. Any capital improvements
or capital projects involving construction or major expansion of a state office
facility, including, but not limited to, district headquarters and detachment
offices, shall be reviewed by the department of general administration for
possible consolidation, colocation, and compliance with state office standards
before allotment of funds. The intent of the requirement imposed by this
section is to eliminate duplication and reduce total office space requirements
where feasible, while ensuring proper service to the public.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
1005. The governor, through the
office of financial management, may authorize a transfer of appropriation
authority provided for a capital project that is in excess of the amount
required for the completion of such project to another capital project for
which the appropriation is insufficient. No such transfer may be used to
expand the capacity of any facility beyond that intended by the legislature in
making the appropriation. Such transfers may be effected only between capital
appropriations to a specific department or agency and only between capital
projects that are funded from the same fund or account. No transfers may occur
between projects to local government agencies except where the grants are
provided within a single omnibus appropriation and where such transfers are
specifically authorized by the implementing statutes which govern the grants.

For purposes of this
section, the governor may find that an amount is in excess of the amount
required for the completion of a project only if: (1) The project defined in
the notes to the budget document is substantially complete and there are funds
remaining; or (2) bids have been let on a project and it appears to a substantial
certainty that the project as defined in the notes to the budget document can
be completed within the biennium for less than the amount appropriated in this
act.

For the purposes of
this section, the legislature intends that each project be defined as proposed
to the legislature in the governor's budget document, unless it clearly appears
from the legislative history that the legislature intended to define the scope
of a project in a different way.

A report of any
transfer effected under this section, except emergency projects or any transfer
under $250,000, shall be filed with the legislative transportation committees
of the senate and the house of representatives by the office of financial
management at least thirty days before the date the transfer is effected. The
office of financial management shall report all emergency or smaller transfers
within thirty days from the date of transfer.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
1006. If any provision of this
act or its application to any person or circumstance is held invalid, the
remainder of the act or the application of the provision to other persons or
circumstances is not affected.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
1007. This act is necessary for
the immediate preservation of the public peace, health, or safety, or support
of the state government and its existing public institutions, and takes effect
immediately.

INDEX PAGE
#

DEPARTMENT OF COMMUNITY,
TRADE, AND ECONOMIC DEVELOPMENT....... 53

DEPARTMENT
OF REVENUE........................................... 2

DEPARTMENT
OF TRANSPORTATION..................... 2, 3, 46, 48, 51

CAPITAL
FACILITIES--PROGRAM D................................... 3

IMPROVEMENTS--PROGRAM
I......................................... 3

LOCAL
PROGRAMS--PROGRAM Z--CAPITAL............................. 51

PRESERVATION--PROGRAM
P........................................ 46

PUBLIC
TRANSPORTATION--PROGRAM V................................ 2

RAIL--PROGRAM
Y--CAPITAL....................................... 48

WASHINGTON
STATE FERRIES CONSTRUCTION--PROGRAM W............... 46

STATE
TREASURER................................................ 53

BOND
RETIREMENT AND INTEREST................................... 53

STATE
REVENUES FOR DISTRIBUTION................................ 53

---
END ---