BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF
WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec.
1. (1) The legislature
recognizes the need to encourage investment in proven prevention and
intervention programs for youth at high risk of becoming involved in the
juvenile and adult justice systems.

(2) The state institute
for public policy must conduct the necessary research in order to recommend to
the legislature the criteria, processes, and institutional arrangements under
which proven best practices could be state-certified, the reductions in the
state justice system caseloads estimated, and the unit cost and total cost
savings estimated for intervention and prevention programs focused on youth at
high risk for involvement with the juvenile and adult justice systems.

(3) The institute for
public policy will report its findings and recommendations to the legislature
by December 15, 2002.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 2. This act is necessary for
the immediate preservation of the public peace, health, or safety, or support
of the state government and its existing public institutions, and takes effect
April 1, 2002.

---
END ---