BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF
WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec.
1. A new section is added
to chapter 9.94A RCW to read as follows:

(1) When a person who
has been convicted of one or more felonies has completed all of the
requirements of all of his or her sentences, except for legal financial
obligations, the secretary or the secretary's designee shall issue a
certificate of restoration of the right to vote to the offender. A continuing
obligation to refrain from contacting certain persons or being in certain
locations is not affected by, and shall not bar, the issuance of this
certificate.

(2) The certificate
shall be provided to the offender in person or by mailing the certificate to
the offender's last known address. It shall also be sent to the secretary of
state and the county auditor for the county of the offender's last known
address. In making a reasonable effort to assure that the notice reaches the
offender, the department shall utilize likely sources of current address
information, such as the department of licensing, and shall take steps to
ascertain that the person to whom the notice is sent is accurately identified.
The department shall maintain an easily accessible record of the issuance of the
certificate.

(3) The certificate
shall have the sole effect of restoring the voting right of the offender, and
the certificate shall so state. Nothing in this section affects or prevents
the enforcement of legal financial obligations or the offender's obligation to
comply with an order issued under chapter 10.99 RCW that excludes or prohibits
the offender from having contact with a specified person or coming within a set
distance of any specified location that was contained in the judgment and
sentence.

(4) The department
shall issue certificates of restoration of the right to vote to all felony
offenders who have completed all of the requirements of their sentences prior
to the effective date of this act, except for legal financial obligations, if a
certificate of discharge has not previously been issued for that offender under
RCW 9.94A.637. The department shall utilize the same procedures for notice as
set forth in subsection (2) of this section.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
2. A new section is added
to chapter 9.96 RCW to read as follows:

(1) When an offender
has completed all of the requirements of all of his or her sentences, except
for legal financial obligations, the indeterminate sentencing review board
shall issue a certificate of restoration of the right to vote to the offender.
A continuing obligation to refrain from contacting certain persons or being in
certain locations is not affected by, and shall not bar, the issuance of this
certificate.

(2) The certificate
shall be provided to the offender in person or by mailing the certificate to
the offender's last known address. It shall also be sent to the secretary of
state and the county auditor for the county of the offender's last known
address. In making a reasonable effort to assure that the notice reaches the
offender, the board shall utilize likely sources of current address
information, such as the department of licensing, and shall take steps to
ascertain that the person to whom the notice is sent is accurately identified.
The department of corrections shall maintain an easily accessible record of the
issuance of the certificate.

(3) The certificate
shall have the sole effect of restoring the voting right of the offender, and
the certificate shall so state. Nothing in this section affects or prevents
the enforcement of legal financial obligations or the offender's obligation to
comply with an order issued under chapter 10.99 RCW that excludes or prohibits
the offender from having contact with a specified person or coming within a set
distance of any specified location that was contained in the judgment and
sentence.

(4) The board shall
issue certificates of restoration of the right to vote to all felony offenders
who have completed all of the requirements of their sentences prior to the
effective date of this act, except for legal financial obligations, if a
certificate of discharge has not previously been issued for that offender under
RCW 9.96.050. The board shall utilize the same procedures for notice as set forth
in subsection (2) of this section.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
3. A new section is added
to chapter 9.94A RCW to read as follows:

(1) When an offender
has completed all of the requirements of all of his or her federal or
out-of-state felony sentences, except for legal financial obligations, the
clemency and pardons board shall issue a certificate of restoration of the
right to vote to the offender. A continuing obligation to refrain from
contacting certain persons or being in certain locations is not affected by,
and shall not bar, the issuance of this certificate.

(2) The certificate
shall be provided to the offender in person or by mailing the certificate to
the offender's last known address. It shall also be sent to the secretary of
state and the county auditor for the county of the offender's last known
address. In making a reasonable effort to assure that the notice reaches the
offender, the board shall utilize likely sources of current address
information, such as the department of licensing, and shall take steps to
ascertain that the person to whom the notice is sent is accurately identified.
The department of corrections shall maintain an easily accessible record of the
issuance of the certificate.

(3) The certificate
shall have the sole effect of restoring the voting right of the offender, and
the certificate shall so state. Nothing in this section affects or prevents
the enforcement of legal financial obligations or the offender's obligation to
comply with an order issued that excludes or prohibits the offender from having
contact with a specified person or coming within a set distance of any
specified location that was contained in the judgment and sentence.

(4) The
board shall issue certificates of restoration of the right to vote to all
felony offenders who have completed all of the requirements of their sentences
prior to the effective date of this act, except for legal financial
obligations. The board shall utilize the same procedures for notice as set
forth in subsection (2) of this section.

---
END ---