BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF
WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1. RCW 74.46.020 and 2001
1st sp.s. c 8 s 1 are each amended to read as follows:

Unless the context
clearly requires otherwise, the definitions in this section apply throughout
this chapter.

(1) "Accrual
method of accounting" means a method of accounting in which revenues are
reported in the period when they are earned, regardless of when they are
collected, and expenses are reported in the period in which they are incurred,
regardless of when they are paid.

(2)
"Appraisal" means the process of estimating the fair market value or
reconstructing the historical cost of an asset acquired in a past period as
performed by a professionally designated real estate appraiser with no
pecuniary interest in the property to be appraised. It includes a systematic,
analytic determination and the recording and analyzing of property facts,
rights, investments, and values based on a personal inspection and inventory of
the property.

(3) "Arm's-length
transaction" means a transaction resulting from good-faith bargaining
between a buyer and seller who are not related organizations and have adverse
positions in the market place. Sales or exchanges of nursing home facilities
among two or more parties in which all parties subsequently continue to own one
or more of the facilities involved in the transactions shall not be considered as
arm's-length transactions for purposes of this chapter. Sale of a nursing home
facility which is subsequently leased back to the seller within five years of
the date of sale shall not be considered as an arm's-length transaction for
purposes of this chapter.

(4) "Assets"
means economic resources of the contractor, recognized and measured in
conformity with generally accepted accounting principles.

(5) "Audit"
or "department audit" means an examination of the records of a
nursing facility participating in the medicaid payment system, including but
not limited to: The contractor's financial and statistical records, cost
reports and all supporting documentation and schedules, receivables, and
resident trust funds, to be performed as deemed necessary by the department and
according to department rule.

(6) "Bad
debts" means amounts considered to be uncollectible from accounts and
notes receivable.

(7) "Beneficial
owner" means:

(a) Any person who,
directly or indirectly, through any contract, arrangement, understanding,
relationship, or otherwise has or shares:

(i) Voting power which
includes the power to vote, or to direct the voting of such ownership interest;
and/or

(ii) Investment power
which includes the power to dispose, or to direct the disposition of such
ownership interest;

(b) Any person who,
directly or indirectly, creates or uses a trust, proxy, power of attorney,
pooling arrangement, or any other contract, arrangement, or device with the
purpose or effect of divesting himself or herself of beneficial ownership of an
ownership interest or preventing the vesting of such beneficial ownership as
part of a plan or scheme to evade the reporting requirements of this chapter;

(c) Any person who,
subject to (b) of this subsection, has the right to acquire beneficial
ownership of such ownership interest within sixty days, including but not
limited to any right to acquire:

(i) Through the
exercise of any option, warrant, or right;

(ii) Through the
conversion of an ownership interest;

(iii) Pursuant to the
power to revoke a trust, discretionary account, or similar arrangement; or

(iv) Pursuant to the
automatic termination of a trust, discretionary account, or similar arrangement;

except that, any person who
acquires an ownership interest or power specified in (c)(i), (ii), or (iii) of
this subsection with the purpose or effect of changing or influencing the
control of the contractor, or in connection with or as a participant in any
transaction having such purpose or effect, immediately upon such acquisition
shall be deemed to be the beneficial owner of the ownership interest which may
be acquired through the exercise or conversion of such ownership interest or
power;

(d) Any person who in
the ordinary course of business is a pledgee of ownership interest under a
written pledge agreement shall not be deemed to be the beneficial owner of such
pledged ownership interest until the pledgee has taken all formal steps
necessary which are required to declare a default and determines that the power
to vote or to direct the vote or to dispose or to direct the disposition of
such pledged ownership interest will be exercised; except that:

(i) The pledgee
agreement is bona fide and was not entered into with the purpose nor with the
effect of changing or influencing the control of the contractor, nor in
connection with any transaction having such purpose or effect, including
persons meeting the conditions set forth in (b) of this subsection; and

(ii) The pledgee
agreement, prior to default, does not grant to the pledgee:

(A) The power to vote
or to direct the vote of the pledged ownership interest; or

(B) The power to
dispose or direct the disposition of the pledged ownership interest, other than
the grant of such power(s) pursuant to a pledge agreement under which credit is
extended and in which the pledgee is a broker or dealer.

(8)
"Capitalization" means the recording of an expenditure as an asset.

(9) "Case
mix" means a measure of the intensity of care and services needed by the
residents of a nursing facility or a group of residents in the facility.

(10) "Case mix
index" means a number representing the average case mix of a nursing
facility.

(11) "Case mix
weight" means a numeric score that identifies the relative resources used
by a particular group of a nursing facility's residents.

(12) "Certificate
of capital authorization" means a certification from the department for an
allocation from the biennial capital financing authorization for all new or
replacement building construction, or for major renovation projects, receiving
a certificate of need or a certificate of need exemption under chapter 70.38
RCW after July 1, 2001.

(13)
"Contractor" means a person or entity licensed under chapter 18.51
RCW to operate a medicare and medicaid certified nursing facility, responsible
for operational decisions, and contracting with the department to provide
services to medicaid recipients residing in the facility.

(14) "Default
case" means no initial assessment has been completed for a resident and
transmitted to the department by the cut‑off date, or an assessment is
otherwise past due for the resident, under state and federal requirements.

(15)
"Department" means the department of social and health services
(DSHS) and its employees.

(16)
"Depreciation" means the systematic distribution of the cost or other
basis of tangible assets, less salvage, over the estimated useful life of the
assets.

(17) "Direct
care" means nursing care and related care provided to nursing facility
residents. Therapy care shall not be considered part of direct care.

(18) "Direct care
supplies" means medical, pharmaceutical, and other supplies required for
the direct care of a nursing facility's residents.

(19) "Entity"
means an individual, partnership, corporation, limited liability company, or
any other association of individuals capable of entering enforceable contracts.

(20) "Equity"
means the net book value of all tangible and intangible assets less the
recorded value of all liabilities, as recognized and measured in conformity
with generally accepted accounting principles.

(21) "Essential
community provider" means a facility which is the only nursing facility within
a commuting distance radius of at least forty minutes duration, traveling by
automobile.

(22)
"Facility" or "nursing facility" means a nursing home
licensed in accordance with chapter 18.51 RCW, excepting nursing homes
certified as institutions for mental diseases, or that portion of a
multiservice facility licensed as a nursing home, or that portion of a hospital
licensed in accordance with chapter 70.41 RCW which operates as a nursing home.

(23) "Fair market
value" means the replacement cost of an asset less observed physical
depreciation on the date for which the market value is being determined.

(24) "Financial
statements" means statements prepared and presented in conformity with
generally accepted accounting principles including, but not limited to, balance
sheet, statement of operations, statement of changes in financial position, and
related notes.

(25) "Generally
accepted accounting principles" means accounting principles approved by
the financial accounting standards board (FASB).

(26) "Goodwill"
means the excess of the price paid for a nursing facility business over the
fair market value of all net identifiable tangible and intangible assets
acquired, as measured in accordance with generally accepted accounting
principles.

(27) "Grouper"
means a computer software product that groups individual nursing facility
residents into case mix classification groups based on specific resident
assessment data and computer logic.

(28) "High
labor-cost county" means an urban county in which the median allowable
facility cost per case mix unit is more than ten percent higher than the median
allowable facility cost per case mix unit among all other urban counties,
excluding that county.

(29) "Historical
cost" means the actual cost incurred in acquiring and preparing an asset
for use, including feasibility studies, architect's fees, and engineering
studies.

(30) "Home and
central office costs" means costs that are incurred in the support and
operation of a home and central office. Home and central office costs include
centralized services that are performed in support of a nursing facility. The
department may exclude from this definition costs that are nonduplicative,
documented, ordinary, necessary, and related to the provision of care services
to authorized patients.

(31) "Imprest
fund" means a fund which is regularly replenished in exactly the amount
expended from it.

(32) "Joint
facility costs" means any costs which represent resources which benefit
more than one facility, or one facility and any other entity.

(33) "Lease
agreement" means a contract between two parties for the possession and use
of real or personal property or assets for a specified period of time in
exchange for specified periodic payments. Elimination (due to any cause other
than death or divorce) or addition of any party to the contract, expiration, or
modification of any lease term in effect on January 1, 1980, or termination of
the lease by either party by any means shall constitute a termination of the
lease agreement. An extension or renewal of a lease agreement, whether or not
pursuant to a renewal provision in the lease agreement, shall be considered a
new lease agreement. A strictly formal change in the lease agreement which
modifies the method, frequency, or manner in which the lease payments are made,
but does not increase the total lease payment obligation of the lessee, shall
not be considered modification of a lease term.

(34) "Medical care
program" or "medicaid program" means medical assistance,
including nursing care, provided under RCW 74.09.500 or authorized state
medical care services.

(35) "Medical care
recipient," "medicaid recipient," or "recipient" means
an individual determined eligible by the department for the services provided
under chapter 74.09 RCW.

(36) "Minimum data
set" means the overall data component of the resident assessment
instrument, indicating the strengths, needs, and preferences of an individual
nursing facility resident.

(37) "Net book
value" means the historical cost of an asset less accumulated
depreciation.

(38) "Net invested
funds" means the net book value of tangible fixed assets employed by a
contractor to provide services under the medical care program, including ((land,))
buildings((,)) and equipment, and excluding land and land
improvements, as recognized and measured in conformity with generally
accepted accounting principles. The allowable net book value of buildings
and building improvements is eighty percent of their actual net book value.

(39) "Nonurban
county" means a county which is not located in a metropolitan statistical
area as determined and defined by the United States office of management and
budget or other appropriate agency or office of the federal government.

(40) "Operating
lease" means a lease under which rental or lease expenses are included in
current expenses in accordance with generally accepted accounting principles.

(41) "Owner"
means a sole proprietor, general or limited partners, members of a limited
liability company, and beneficial interest holders of five percent or more of a
corporation's outstanding stock.

(42) "Ownership
interest" means all interests beneficially owned by a person, calculated
in the aggregate, regardless of the form which such beneficial ownership takes.

(43) "Patient
day" or "resident day" means a calendar day of care provided to
a nursing facility resident, regardless of payment source, which will include
the day of admission and exclude the day of discharge; except that, when admission
and discharge occur on the same day, one day of care shall be deemed to exist.
A "medicaid day" or "recipient day" means a calendar day of
care provided to a medicaid recipient determined eligible by the department for
services provided under chapter 74.09 RCW, subject to the same conditions
regarding admission and discharge applicable to a patient day or resident day
of care.

(44)
"Professionally designated real estate appraiser" means an individual
who is regularly engaged in the business of providing real estate valuation
services for a fee, and who is deemed qualified by a nationally recognized real
estate appraisal educational organization on the basis of extensive practical
appraisal experience, including the writing of real estate valuation reports as
well as the passing of written examinations on valuation practice and theory,
and who by virtue of membership in such organization is required to subscribe
and adhere to certain standards of professional practice as such organization
prescribes.

(45) "Qualified
therapist" means:

(a) A mental health
professional as defined by chapter 71.05 RCW;

(b) A mental
retardation professional who is a therapist approved by the department who has
had specialized training or one year's experience in treating or working with
the mentally retarded or developmentally disabled;

(c) A speech
pathologist who is eligible for a certificate of clinical competence in speech
pathology or who has the equivalent education and clinical experience;

(d) A physical
therapist as defined by chapter 18.74 RCW;

(e) An occupational
therapist who is a graduate of a program in occupational therapy, or who has
the equivalent of such education or training; and

(f) A respiratory care
practitioner certified under chapter 18.89 RCW.

(46) "Rate"
or "rate allocation" means the medicaid per-patient-day payment
amount for medicaid patients calculated in accordance with the allocation
methodology set forth in part E of this chapter.

(47) "Real
property," whether leased or owned by the contractor, means the building,
allowable land, land improvements, and building improvements associated with a
nursing facility.

(48) "Rebased
rate" or "cost-rebased rate" means a facility-specific component
rate assigned to a nursing facility for a particular rate period established on
desk-reviewed, adjusted costs reported for that facility covering at least six
months of a prior calendar year designated as a year to be used for
cost-rebasing payment rate allocations under the provisions of this chapter.

(49)
"Records" means those data supporting all financial statements and
cost reports including, but not limited to, all general and subsidiary ledgers,
books of original entry, and transaction documentation, however such data are
maintained.

(50) "Related
organization" means an entity which is under common ownership and/or
control with, or has control of, or is controlled by, the contractor.

(a) "Common
ownership" exists when an entity is the beneficial owner of five percent
or more ownership interest in the contractor and any other entity.

(b) "Control"
exists where an entity has the power, directly or indirectly, significantly to
influence or direct the actions or policies of an organization or institution,
whether or not it is legally enforceable and however it is exercisable or
exercised.

(51) "Related
care" means only those services that are directly related to providing
direct care to nursing facility residents. These services include, but are not
limited to, nursing direction and supervision, medical direction, medical records,
pharmacy services, activities, and social services.

(52) "Resident
assessment instrument," including federally approved modifications for use
in this state, means a federally mandated, comprehensive nursing facility
resident care planning and assessment tool, consisting of the minimum data set
and resident assessment protocols.

(53) "Resident
assessment protocols" means those components of the resident assessment
instrument that use the minimum data set to trigger or flag a resident's
potential problems and risk areas.

(54) "Resource
utilization groups" means a case mix classification system that identifies
relative resources needed to care for an individual nursing facility resident.

(55) "Restricted
fund" means those funds the principal and/or income of which is limited by
agreement with or direction of the donor to a specific purpose.

(56)
"Secretary" means the secretary of the department of social and
health services.

(57) "Support
services" means food, food preparation, dietary, housekeeping, and laundry
services provided to nursing facility residents.

(58) "Therapy
care" means those services required by a nursing facility resident's
comprehensive assessment and plan of care, that are provided by qualified
therapists, or support personnel under their supervision, including related
costs as designated by the department.

(59) "Title
XIX" or "medicaid" means the 1965 amendments to the social
security act, P.L. 89‑07, as amended and the medicaid program
administered by the department.

(60) "Urban
county" means a county which is located in a metropolitan statistical area
as determined and defined by the United States office of management and budget
or other appropriate agency or office of the federal government.

Sec. 2. RCW 74.46.165 and 2001
1st sp.s. c 8 s 2 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) Contractors shall
be required to submit with each annual nursing facility cost report a proposed
settlement report showing underspending or overspending in each component rate
during the cost report year on a per-resident day basis. The department shall
accept or reject the proposed settlement report, explain any adjustments, and
issue a revised settlement report if needed.

(2) Contractors shall
not be required to refund payments made in the operations, ((variable
return,)) property, and financing allowance component rates in excess of
the adjusted costs of providing services corresponding to these components.

(3) The facility will
return to the department any overpayment amounts in each of the direct care,
therapy care, and support services rate components that the department
identifies following the audit and settlement procedures as described in this
chapter((, provided that the contractor may retain any overpayment that does
not exceed 1.0% of the facility's direct care, therapy care, and support
services component rate. However, no overpayments may be retained in a cost
center to which savings have been shifted to cover a deficit, as provided in
subsection (4) of this section. Facilities that are not in substantial
compliance for more than ninety days, and facilities that provide substandard
quality of care at any time, during the period for which settlement is being
calculated, will not be allowed to retain any amount of overpayment in the
facility's direct care, therapy care, and support services component rate. The
terms "not in substantial compliance" and "substandard quality
of care" shall be defined by federal survey regulations)).

(4) Determination of
unused rate funds, including the amounts of direct care, therapy care, and
support services to be recovered, shall be done separately for each component
rate, and, except as otherwise provided in this subsection, neither costs nor
rate payments shall be shifted from one component rate or corresponding service
area to another in determining the degree of underspending or recovery, if
any. In computing a preliminary or final settlement, savings in the support
services cost center shall be shifted to cover a deficit in the direct care or
therapy cost centers up to the amount of any savings, but no more than twenty
percent of the support services component rate may be shifted. In computing a
preliminary or final settlement, savings in direct care and therapy care may be
shifted to cover a deficit in these two cost centers up to the amount of
savings in each, regardless of the percentage of either component rate
shifted. ((Contractor-retained overpayments up to one percent of direct
care, therapy care, and support services rate components, as authorized in
subsection (3) of this section, shall be calculated and applied after all
shifting is completed.))

(5) Total and component
payment rates assigned to a nursing facility, as calculated and revised, if
needed, under the provisions of this chapter and those rules as the department
may adopt, shall represent the maximum payment for nursing facility services
rendered to medicaid recipients for the period the rates are in effect. No
increase in payment to a contractor shall result from spending above the total
payment rate or in any rate component.

(6) RCW 74.46.150
through 74.46.180, and rules adopted by the department prior to July 1, 1998,
shall continue to govern the medicaid settlement process for periods prior to
October 1, 1998, as if these statutes and rules remained in full force and
effect.

(7) For calendar year
1998, the department shall calculate split settlements covering January 1,
1998, through September 30, 1998, and October 1, 1998, through December 31,
1998. For the period beginning October 1, 1998, rules specified in this
chapter shall apply. The department shall, by rule, determine the division of
calendar year 1998 adjusted costs for settlement purposes.

Sec. 3. RCW 74.46.310 and 1983
1st ex.s. c 67 s 16 are each amended to read as follows:

The following costs
shall be capitalized:

(1) Expenses for
facilities or equipment with historical cost in excess of ((seven)) two
thousand five hundred ((fifty)) dollars per unit and a useful life
of more than one year from the date of purchase; and

(2) Expenses for
equipment with historical cost of ((seven)) two thousand five
hundred ((fifty)) dollars or less per unit if either:

(a) The item was
acquired in a group purchase where the total cost exceeded ((seven)) two
thousand five hundred ((fifty)) dollars; or

(b) The item was part
of the initial stock of the facility.

(3) Dollar limits in
this section may be adjusted for economic trends and conditions by the
department as established by rule ((and regulation)).

Sec. 4. RCW 74.46.320 and 1980 c
177 s 32 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) Depreciation
expense on depreciable assets which are required in the regular course of
providing patient care will be an allowable cost. ((It)) The
depreciation expense shall be computed using the depreciation base, lives,
and methods specified in this chapter.

(2) Effective July
1, 2002, the department will:

(a) Not allow
depreciation expense for land improvements; and

(b) Limit allowable
depreciation to eighty percent of the total depreciation expense on building
and building improvements.

Sec. 5. RCW 74.46.330 and 1980 c
177 s 33 are each amended to read as follows:

Tangible assets of the
following types in which a contractor has an interest through ownership or
leasing are subject to depreciation:

(1) Building - the
basic structure or shell and additions thereto;

(2) Building fixed
equipment - attachments to buildings, including, but not limited to, wiring,
electrical fixtures, plumbing, elevators, heating system, and air conditioning
system. The general characteristics of this equipment are:

(a) Affixed to the
building and not subject to transfer; and

(b) A fairly long life,
but shorter than the life of the building to which affixed;

(3) Major movable
equipment including, but not limited to, beds, wheelchairs, desks, and x-ray
machines. The general characteristics of this equipment are:

(a) A relatively fixed
location in the building;

(b) Capable of being
moved as distinguished from building equipment;

(c) A unit cost
sufficient to justify ledger control;

(d) Sufficient size and
identity to make control feasible by means of identification tags; and

(e) A minimum life
greater than one year;

(4) Minor equipment
including, but not limited to, waste baskets, bed pans, syringes, catheters,
silverware, mops, and buckets which are properly capitalized. No depreciation
shall be taken on items which are not properly capitalized as directed in RCW
74.46.310. The general characteristics of minor equipment are:

(a) In general, no
fixed location and subject to use by various departments;

(b) Small in size and
unit cost;

(c) Subject to
inventory control;

(d) Large number in
use; and

(e) Generally, a useful
life of one to three years;

(5) ((Land
improvements including, but not limited to, paving, tunnels, underpasses,
on-site sewer and water lines, parking lots, shrubbery, fences, and walls where
replacement is the responsibility of the contractor; and

(6))) Leasehold improvements - betterments and
additions made by the lessee to the leased property, except those made to
land improvements, which become the property of the lessor after the
expiration of the lease.

Sec. 6. RCW 74.46.350 and 1999 c
353 s 13 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) Buildings((,
land)) and building improvements((,)) subject to the limit
imposed by RCW 74.46.320 and fixed equipment shall be depreciated using the
straight-line method of depreciation. For new or replacement building
construction or for major renovations, either of which receives certificate of
need approval or certificate of need exemption under chapter 70.38 RCW on or
after July 1, 1999, the number of years used to depreciate fixed equipment
shall be the same number of years as the life of the building to which it is
affixed. Major-minor equipment shall be depreciated using either the
straight-line method, the sum-of-the-years' digits method, or declining balance
method not to exceed one hundred fifty percent of the straight line rate.
Contractors who have elected to take either the sum-of-the-years' digits method
or the declining balance method of depreciation on major-minor equipment may
change to the straight-line method without permission of the department.

(2) The annual
provision for depreciation shall be reduced by the portion allocable to use of
the asset for purposes which are neither necessary nor related to patient care.

(3) No
further depreciation shall be claimed after an asset has been fully depreciated
unless a new depreciation base is established pursuant to RCW 74.46.360.

Sec. 7. RCW 74.46.410 and 2001
1st sp.s. c 8 s 3 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) Costs will be
unallowable if they are not documented, necessary, ordinary, and related to the
provision of care services to authorized patients.

(2) Unallowable costs
include, but are not limited to, the following:

(a) Costs of items or
services not covered by the medical care program. Costs of such items or
services will be unallowable even if they are indirectly reimbursed by the
department as the result of an authorized reduction in patient contribution;

(b) Costs of services
and items provided to recipients which are covered by the department's medical
care program but not included in the medicaid per-resident day payment rate
established by the department under this chapter;

(c) Costs associated
with a capital expenditure subject to section 1122 approval (part 100, Title 42
C.F.R.) if the department found it was not consistent with applicable
standards, criteria, or plans. If the department was not given timely notice
of a proposed capital expenditure, all associated costs will be unallowable up
to the date they are determined to be reimbursable under applicable federal
regulations;

(d) Costs associated
with a construction or acquisition project requiring certificate of need
approval, or exemption from the requirements for certificate of need for the
replacement of existing nursing home beds, pursuant to chapter 70.38 RCW if
such approval or exemption was not obtained;

(e) Interest costs
other than those provided by RCW 74.46.290 on and after January 1, 1985;

(f) Salaries or other
compensation of owners, officers, directors, stockholders, partners,
principals, participants, and others associated with the contractor or its home
office, including all board of directors' fees for any purpose, except
reasonable compensation paid for service related to patient care;

(g) Costs in excess of
limits or in violation of principles set forth in this chapter;

(h) Costs resulting
from transactions or the application of accounting methods which circumvent the
principles of the payment system set forth in this chapter;

(i) Costs applicable to
services, facilities, and supplies furnished by a related organization in
excess of the lower of the cost to the related organization or the price of
comparable services, facilities, or supplies purchased elsewhere;

(j) Bad debts of
non-Title XIX recipients. Bad debts of Title XIX recipients are allowable if
the debt is related to covered services, it arises from the recipient's
required contribution toward the cost of care, the provider can establish that
reasonable collection efforts were made, the debt was actually uncollectible
when claimed as worthless, and sound business judgment established that there
was no likelihood of recovery at any time in the future;

(k) Charity and
courtesy allowances;

(l) Cash, assessments,
or other contributions, excluding dues, to charitable organizations,
professional organizations, trade associations, or political parties, and costs
incurred to improve community or public relations;

(m) Vending machine
expenses;

(n) Expenses for barber
or beautician services not included in routine care;

(o) Funeral and burial
expenses;

(p) Costs of gift shop
operations and inventory;

(q) Personal items such
as cosmetics, smoking materials, newspapers and magazines, and clothing, except
those used in patient activity programs;

(r) Fund-raising
expenses, except those directly related to the patient activity program;

(s) Penalties and
fines;

(t) Expenses related to
telephones, radios, and similar appliances in patients' private accommodations;

(u) Televisions
acquired prior to July 1, 2001;

(v) Federal, state, and
other income taxes;

(w) Costs of special
care services except where authorized by the department;

(x) Expenses of an
employee benefit not in fact made available to all employees on an equal or
fair basis, for example, key-man insurance and other insurance or retirement
plans;

(y) Expenses of
profit-sharing plans;

(z) Expenses related to
the purchase and/or use of private or commercial airplanes which are in excess of
what a prudent contractor would expend for the ordinary and economic provision
of such a transportation need related to patient care;

(aa) Personal expenses
and allowances of owners or relatives;

(bb) All expenses of
maintaining professional licenses or membership in professional organizations;

(cc) Costs related to
agreements not to compete;

(dd) Amortization of
goodwill, lease acquisition, or any other intangible asset, whether related to
resident care or not, and whether recognized under generally accepted
accounting principles or not;

(ee) Expenses related
to vehicles which are in excess of what a prudent contractor would expend for
the ordinary and economic provision of transportation needs related to patient
care;

(ff) Legal and
consultant fees in connection with a fair hearing against the department where
a decision is rendered in favor of the department or where otherwise the
determination of the department stands;

(gg) Legal and
consultant fees of a contractor or contractors in connection with a lawsuit
against the department;

(hh) Lease acquisition
costs, goodwill, the cost of bed rights, or any other intangible assets;

(ii) All rental or
lease costs other than those provided in RCW 74.46.300 on and after January 1,
1985;

(jj) Postsurvey charges
incurred by the facility as a result of subsequent inspections under RCW
18.51.050 which occur beyond the first postsurvey visit during the
certification survey calendar year;

(kk) Compensation paid
for any purchased nursing care services, including registered nurse, licensed
practical nurse, and nurse assistant services, obtained through service
contract arrangement in excess of the amount of compensation paid for such
hours of nursing care service had they been paid at the average hourly wage,
including related taxes and benefits, for in-house nursing care staff of like
classification at the same nursing facility, as reported in the most recent
cost report period;

(ll) For all partial or
whole rate periods after July 17, 1984, costs of land and depreciable assets
that cannot be reimbursed under the Deficit Reduction Act of 1984 and
implementing state statutory and regulatory provisions;

(mm) Costs reported by
the contractor for a prior period to the extent such costs, due to statutory
exemption, will not be incurred by the contractor in the period to be covered
by the rate;

(nn) Costs of outside
activities, for example, costs allocated to the use of a vehicle for personal
purposes or related to the part of a facility leased out for office space;

(oo) Travel expenses
outside the states of Idaho, Oregon, and Washington and the province of British
Columbia. However, travel to or from the home or central office of a chain
organization operating a nursing facility is allowed whether inside or outside
these areas if the travel is necessary, ordinary, and related to resident care;

(pp) Moving expenses of
employees in the absence of demonstrated, good-faith effort to recruit within
the states of Idaho, Oregon, and Washington, and the province of British
Columbia;

(qq) Depreciation in
excess of four thousand dollars per year for each passenger car or other
vehicle primarily used by the administrator, facility staff, or central office
staff;

(rr) Costs for
temporary health care personnel from a nursing pool not registered with the
secretary of the department of health;

(ss) Payroll taxes
associated with compensation in excess of allowable compensation of owners,
relatives, and administrative personnel;

(tt) Costs and fees
associated with filing a petition for bankruptcy;

(uu) All advertising or
promotional costs, except reasonable costs of help wanted advertising;

(vv) Outside
consultation expenses required to meet department-required minimum data set
completion proficiency;

(ww) Interest charges
assessed by any department or agency of this state for failure to make a timely
refund of overpayments and interest expenses incurred for loans obtained to
make the refunds;

(xx) All home office or
central office costs, whether on or off the nursing facility premises, and
whether allocated or not to specific services, in excess of the median of those
adjusted costs for all facilities reporting such costs for the most recent
report period; ((and))

(yy) Tax expenses that
a nursing facility has never incurred;

(zz) Depreciation
expense in excess of eighty percent of a nursing facility's total depreciation
expense on building and building improvements; and

(aaa) Depreciation
expense on land improvements.

Sec. 8. RCW 74.46.431 and 2001
1st sp.s. c 8 s 5 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) Effective July 1,
((1999)) 2002, nursing facility medicaid payment rate allocations
shall be facility-specific and shall have ((seven)) six
components: Direct care, therapy care, support services, operations, property,
and financing allowance((, and variable return)). The department
shall establish and adjust each of these components, as provided in this
section and elsewhere in this chapter, for each medicaid nursing facility in
this state.

(2) All component rate
allocations for essential community providers as defined in this chapter shall
be based upon a minimum facility occupancy of eighty-five percent of licensed
beds, regardless of how many beds are set up or in use. For all facilities
other than essential community providers, effective July 1, 2001, component
rate allocations in direct care, therapy care, support services, variable
return, operations, property, and financing allowance shall continue to be
based upon a minimum facility occupancy of eighty-five percent of licensed
beds. For all facilities other than essential community providers, effective
July 1, 2002, ((the)) all component rate allocations ((in
operations, property, and financing allowance)) shall be based upon a
minimum facility occupancy of ninety percent of licensed beds, regardless of how
many beds are set up or in use.

(3) Information and
data sources used in determining medicaid payment rate allocations, including
formulas, procedures, cost report periods, resident assessment instrument
formats, resident assessment methodologies, and resident classification and
case mix weighting methodologies, may be substituted or altered from time to
time as determined by the department.

(4)(a) Direct care
component rate allocations shall be established using adjusted cost report data
covering at least six months. Adjusted cost report data from 1996 will be used
for October 1, 1998, through June 30, 2001, direct care component rate
allocations; adjusted cost report data from 1999 will be used for July 1, 2001,
through June 30, 2004, direct care component rate allocations.

(b) Direct care
component rate allocations based on 1996 cost report data shall be adjusted
annually for economic trends and conditions by a factor or factors defined in
the biennial appropriations act. A different economic trends and conditions
adjustment factor or factors may be defined in the biennial appropriations act
for facilities whose direct care component rate is set equal to their adjusted
June 30, 1998, rate, as provided in RCW 74.46.506(5)(i).

(c) Direct care
component rate allocations based on 1999 cost report data shall be adjusted
annually for economic trends and conditions by a factor or factors defined in
the biennial appropriations act. A different economic trends and conditions
adjustment factor or factors may be defined in the biennial appropriations act
for facilities whose direct care component rate is set equal to their adjusted
June 30, 1998, rate, as provided in RCW 74.46.506(5)(i).

(5)(a) Therapy care
component rate allocations shall be established using adjusted cost report data
covering at least six months. Adjusted cost report data from 1996 will be used
for October 1, 1998, through June 30, 2001, therapy care component rate allocations;
adjusted cost report data from 1999 will be used for July 1, 2001, through June
30, 2004, therapy care component rate allocations.

(b) Therapy care
component rate allocations shall be adjusted annually for economic trends and
conditions by a factor or factors defined in the biennial appropriations act.

(6)(a) Support services
component rate allocations shall be established using adjusted cost report data
covering at least six months. Adjusted cost report data from 1996 shall be
used for October 1, 1998, through June 30, 2001, support services component
rate allocations; adjusted cost report data from 1999 shall be used for July 1,
2001, through June 30, 2004, support services component rate allocations.

(b) Support services
component rate allocations shall be adjusted annually for economic trends and
conditions by a factor or factors defined in the biennial appropriations act.

(7)(a) Operations
component rate allocations shall be established using adjusted cost report data
covering at least six months. Adjusted cost report data from 1996 shall be
used for October 1, 1998, through June 30, 2001, operations component rate
allocations; adjusted cost report data from 1999 shall be used for July 1,
2001, through June 30, 2004, operations component rate allocations.

(b) Operations
component rate allocations shall be adjusted annually for economic trends and
conditions by a factor or factors defined in the biennial appropriations act.

(8) For July 1, 1998,
through September 30, 1998, a facility's property and return on investment
component rates shall be the facility's June 30, 1998, property and return on
investment component rates, without increase. For October 1, 1998, through
June 30, 1999, a facility's property and return on investment component rates
shall be rebased utilizing 1997 adjusted cost report data covering at least six
months of data.

(9) Total payment rates
under the nursing facility medicaid payment system shall not exceed facility
rates charged to the general public for comparable services.

(10) Medicaid
contractors shall pay to all facility staff a minimum wage of the greater of
the state minimum wage or the federal minimum wage.

(11) The department
shall establish in rule procedures, principles, and conditions for determining
component rate allocations for facilities in circumstances not directly
addressed by this chapter, including but not limited to: The need to prorate
inflation for partial-period cost report data, newly constructed facilities,
existing facilities entering the medicaid program for the first time or after a
period of absence from the program, existing facilities with expanded new bed
capacity, existing medicaid facilities following a change of ownership of the
nursing facility business, facilities banking beds or converting beds back into
service, facilities temporarily reducing the number of set-up beds during a
remodel, facilities having less than six months of either resident assessment,
cost report data, or both, under the current contractor prior to rate setting,
and other circumstances.

(12) The department
shall establish in rule procedures, principles, and conditions, including
necessary threshold costs, for adjusting rates to reflect capital improvements
or new requirements imposed by the department or the federal government. Any
such rate adjustments are subject to the provisions of RCW 74.46.421.

(13) Effective July 1,
2001, medicaid rates shall continue to be revised downward in all components,
in accordance with department rules, for facilities converting banked beds to
active service under chapter 70.38 RCW, by using the facility's increased
licensed bed capacity to recalculate minimum occupancy for rate setting.
However, for facilities other than essential community providers which bank
beds under chapter 70.38 RCW, after May 25, 2001, medicaid rates shall be
revised upward, in accordance with department rules, in direct care, therapy
care, and support services((, and variable return)) components
only, by using the facility's decreased licensed bed capacity to recalculate
minimum occupancy for rate setting, but no upward revision shall be made to
operations, property, or financing allowance component rates.

(14) Facilities
obtaining a certificate of need or a certificate of need exemption under chapter
70.38 RCW after June 30, 2001, must have a certificate of capital authorization
in order for (a) the depreciation resulting from the capitalized addition to be
included in calculation of the facility's property component rate allocation;
and (b) the net invested funds associated with the capitalized addition to be
included in calculation of the facility's financing allowance rate allocation.

Sec. 9. RCW 74.46.435 and 2001
1st sp.s. c 8 s 7 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) Effective July 1,
2001, the property component rate allocation for each facility shall be
determined by dividing the sum of the reported allowable prior period actual
depreciation, subject to RCW 74.46.310 through 74.46.380, adjusted for any
capitalized additions or replacements approved by the department, and the
retained savings from such cost center, by the greater of a facility's total
resident days for the facility in the prior period or resident days as
calculated on eighty-five percent facility occupancy. Effective July 1, 2002,
the property component rate allocation for all facilities, except essential
community providers, shall be set by using the greater of a facility's total
resident days from the most recent cost report period or resident days
calculated at ninety percent facility occupancy. If a capitalized addition or
retirement of an asset will result in a different licensed bed capacity during
the ensuing period, the prior period total resident days used in computing the
property component rate shall be adjusted to anticipated resident day level.

(2) A nursing
facility's property component rate allocation shall be rebased annually,
effective July 1st, in accordance with this section and this chapter.

(3) When a certificate
of need for a new facility is requested, the department, in reaching its
decision, shall take into consideration per-bed land and building construction
costs for the facility which shall not exceed a maximum to be established by
the secretary.

(4) Effective July 1,
2001, for the purpose of calculating a nursing facility's property component
rate, if a contractor has elected to bank licensed beds ((prior to April 1))
before May 25, 2001, or elects to convert banked beds to active service
at any time, under chapter 70.38 RCW, the department shall use the facility's
new licensed bed capacity to recalculate minimum occupancy for rate setting and
revise the property component rate, as needed, effective as of the date the
beds are banked or converted to active service. However, in no case shall the
department use less than eighty-five percent occupancy of the facility's
licensed bed capacity after banking or conversion. Effective July 1, 2002, in
no case, other than essential community providers, shall the department use
less than ninety percent occupancy of the facility's licensed bed capacity
after conversion.

(5) The property
component rate allocations calculated in accordance with this section shall be
adjusted to the extent necessary to comply with RCW 74.46.421.

Sec. 10. RCW 74.46.437 and 2001
1st sp.s. c 8 s 8 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) Beginning July 1,
1999, the department shall establish for each medicaid nursing facility a
financing allowance component rate allocation. The financing allowance
component rate shall be rebased annually, effective July 1st, in accordance
with the provisions of this section and this chapter.

(2) Effective July 1,
((2001)) 2002, the financing allowance shall be determined by
multiplying the net invested funds of each facility by ((.10)) .06,
and dividing by the greater of a nursing facility's total resident days from
the most recent cost report period or resident days calculated on ((eighty-five))
ninety percent facility occupancy. ((Effective July 1, 2002, the
financing allowance component rate allocation for all facilities, other than
essential community providers, shall be set by using the greater of a
facility's total resident days from the most recent cost report period or
resident days calculated at ninety percent facility occupancy. However, assets
acquired on or after May 17, 1999, shall be grouped in a separate financing
allowance calculation that shall be multiplied by .085. The financing
allowance factor of .085 shall not be applied to the net invested funds
pertaining to new construction or major renovations receiving certificate of
need approval or an exemption from certificate of need requirements under
chapter 70.38 RCW, or to working drawings that have been submitted to the
department of health for construction review approval, prior to May 17, 1999.))
However, essential community providers will have their resident days
calculated on eighty-five percent facility occupancy. If a capitalized
addition, renovation, replacement, or retirement of an asset will result in a
different licensed bed capacity ((during the ensuing period, the prior
period)), the financing allowance component rate allocation for all
facilities, other than essential community providers will be set by using the
greater of total resident days from the most recent cost report period
used in computing the financing allowance ((shall be adjusted to the greater
of the anticipated resident day level)) or eighty-five percent of the new
licensed bed capacity. Effective July 1, 2002, for all facilities, other than
essential community providers, the total resident days used to compute the
financing allowance after a capitalized addition, renovation, replacement, or
retirement of an asset shall be set by using the greater of a facility's total
resident days from the most recent cost report period or resident days
calculated at ninety percent facility occupancy.

(3) In computing the
portion of net invested funds representing the net book value of tangible fixed
assets, the same assets, depreciation bases, lives, and methods referred to in
RCW 74.46.330, 74.46.350, 74.46.360, 74.46.370, and 74.46.380, including owned
and leased assets, shall be utilized((, except that the capitalized cost of
land upon which the facility is located and such other contiguous land which is
reasonable and necessary for use in the regular course of providing resident
care shall also be included. Subject to provisions and limitations contained
in this chapter, for land purchased by owners or lessors before July 18, 1984,
capitalized cost of land shall be the buyer's capitalized cost. For all
partial or whole rate periods after July 17, 1984, if the land is purchased
after July 17, 1984, capitalized cost shall be that of the owner of record on July
17, 1984, or buyer's capitalized cost, whichever is lower)). In the case
of leased facilities where the net invested funds are unknown or the contractor
is unable to provide necessary information to determine net invested funds, the
secretary shall have the authority to determine an amount for net invested
funds based on an appraisal conducted according to RCW 74.46.360(1).

(4) Effective July 1,
2001, for the purpose of calculating a nursing facility's financing allowance
component rate, if a contractor has elected to bank licensed beds prior to May
25, 2001, or elects to convert banked beds to active service at any time, under
chapter 70.38 RCW, the department shall use the facility's new licensed bed
capacity to recalculate minimum occupancy for rate setting and revise the
financing allowance component rate, as needed, effective as of the date the
beds are banked or converted to active service. However, in no case shall the
department use less than eighty-five percent occupancy of the facility's
licensed bed capacity after banking or conversion. Effective July 1, 2002, in
no case, other than for essential community providers, shall the department use
less than ninety percent occupancy of the facility's licensed bed capacity
after conversion.

(5) The financing
allowance rate allocation calculated in accordance with this section shall be
adjusted to the extent necessary to comply with RCW 74.46.421.

Sec. 11. RCW 74.46.439 and 1999 c
353 s 12 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) In the case of a
facility that was leased by the contractor as of January 1, 1980, in an
arm's-length agreement, which continues to be leased under the same lease
agreement, and for which the annualized lease payment, plus any interest and
depreciation expenses associated with contractor-owned assets, for the period
covered by the prospective rates, divided by the contractor's total resident
days, minus the property component rate allocation, is more than the sum of the
financing allowance ((and the variable return rate)) determined
according to this chapter, the following shall apply:

(a) The financing
allowance shall be recomputed substituting the fair market value of the assets
as of January 1, 1982, as determined by the department of general
administration through an appraisal procedure, less accumulated depreciation on
the lessor's assets since January 1, 1982, for the net book value of the assets
in determining net invested funds for the facility. A determination by the
department of general administration of fair market value shall be final unless
the procedure used to make such a determination is shown to be arbitrary and
capricious.

(b) The ((sum of the))
financing allowance component rate computed under (a) of this subsection
((and the variable return rate)) shall be compared to the annualized
lease payment, plus any interest and depreciation associated with contractor-owned
assets, for the period covered by the prospective rates, divided by the
contractor's total resident days, minus the property component rate. The
lesser of the two amounts shall be called the alternate ((return on
investment)) financing allowance rate.

(c) The ((sum of the))
financing allowance ((and variable return)) rate determined according to
this chapter or the alternate ((return on investment)) financing
allowance component rate, whichever is greater, shall be added to the
prospective rates of the contractor.

(2) In the case of a
facility that was leased by the contractor as of January 1, 1980, in an
arm's-length agreement, if the lease is renewed or extended under a provision
of the lease, the treatment provided in subsection (1) of this section shall be
applied, except that in the case of renewals or extensions made subsequent to
April 1, 1985, reimbursement for the annualized lease payment shall be no
greater than the reimbursement for the annualized lease payment for the last
year prior to the renewal or extension of the lease.

(3) The
alternate ((return on investment)) financing allowance component
rate allocations calculated in accordance with this section shall be adjusted
to the extent necessary to comply with RCW 74.46.421.

Sec. 12. RCW 74.46.506 and 2001
1st sp.s. c 8 s 10 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) The direct care
component rate allocation corresponds to the provision of nursing care for one
resident of a nursing facility for one day, including direct care supplies.
Therapy services and supplies, which correspond to the therapy care component
rate, shall be excluded. The direct care component rate includes elements of
case mix determined consistent with the principles of this section and other
applicable provisions of this chapter.

(2) Beginning October
1, 1998, the department shall determine and update quarterly for each nursing
facility serving medicaid residents a facility-specific per-resident day direct
care component rate allocation, to be effective on the first day of each
calendar quarter. In determining direct care component rates the department
shall utilize, as specified in this section, minimum data set resident
assessment data for each resident of the facility, as transmitted to, and if
necessary corrected by, the department in the resident assessment instrument
format approved by federal authorities for use in this state.

(3) The department may
question the accuracy of assessment data for any resident and utilize corrected
or substitute information, however derived, in determining direct care
component rates. The department is authorized to impose civil fines and to
take adverse rate actions against a contractor, as specified by the department
in rule, in order to obtain compliance with resident assessment and data
transmission requirements and to ensure accuracy.

(4) Cost report data
used in setting direct care component rate allocations shall be 1996 and 1999,
for rate periods as specified in RCW 74.46.431(4)(a).

(5) Beginning October
1, 1998, the department shall rebase each nursing facility's direct care
component rate allocation as described in RCW 74.46.431, adjust its direct care
component rate allocation for economic trends and conditions as described in RCW
74.46.431, and update its medicaid average case mix index, consistent with the
following:

(a) Reduce total direct
care costs reported by each nursing facility for the applicable cost report
period specified in RCW 74.46.431(4)(a) to reflect any department adjustments((,
and to eliminate reported resident therapy costs and adjustments,)) in
order to derive the facility's total allowable direct care cost;

(b) Divide each
facility's total allowable direct care cost by the greater of its
adjusted resident days for the same report period((, increased if necessary
to a minimum occupancy of eighty-five percent; that is, the greater of actual))
or imputed occupancy at:

(i) Eighty-five
percent of licensed beds, to derive the facility's allowable direct care cost per
resident day; or

(ii) Effective July
1, 2002, ninety percent except, essential community providers will have their
imputed occupancy set using eighty-five percent of licensed beds, to derive the
facility's allowable direct care cost per resident day;

(c) Adjust the
facility's per resident day direct care cost by the applicable factor specified
in RCW 74.46.431(4) (b) and (c) to derive its adjusted allowable direct care
cost per resident day;

(d) Divide each
facility's adjusted allowable direct care cost per resident day by the facility
average case mix index for the applicable quarters specified by RCW
74.46.501(7)(b) to derive the facility's allowable direct care cost per case
mix unit;

(e) Effective for July
1, 2001, rate setting, divide nursing facilities into at least two and, if
applicable, three peer groups: Those located in nonurban counties; those
located in high labor-cost counties, if any; and those located in other urban
counties;

(f) Array separately
the allowable direct care cost per case mix unit for all facilities in nonurban
counties; for all facilities in high labor-cost counties, if applicable; and
for all facilities in other urban counties, and determine the median allowable
direct care cost per case mix unit for each peer group;

(g) Except as provided
in (i) of this subsection, from October 1, 1998, through June 30, 2000,
determine each facility's quarterly direct care component rate as follows:

(i) Any facility whose
allowable cost per case mix unit is less than eighty-five percent of the
facility's peer group median established under (f) of this subsection shall be
assigned a cost per case mix unit equal to eighty-five percent of the
facility's peer group median, and shall have a direct care component rate
allocation equal to the facility's assigned cost per case mix unit multiplied
by that facility's medicaid average case mix index from the applicable quarter
specified in RCW 74.46.501(7)(c);

(ii) Any facility whose
allowable cost per case mix unit is greater than one hundred fifteen percent of
the peer group median established under (f) of this subsection shall be
assigned a cost per case mix unit equal to one hundred fifteen percent of the
peer group median, and shall have a direct care component rate allocation equal
to the facility's assigned cost per case mix unit multiplied by that facility's
medicaid average case mix index from the applicable quarter specified in RCW
74.46.501(7)(c);

(iii) Any facility
whose allowable cost per case mix unit is between eighty-five and one hundred
fifteen percent of the peer group median established under (f) of this
subsection shall have a direct care component rate allocation equal to the
facility's allowable cost per case mix unit multiplied by that facility's
medicaid average case mix index from the applicable quarter specified in RCW
74.46.501(7)(c);

(h) Except as provided
in (i) of this subsection, from July 1, 2000, forward, and for all future rate
setting, determine each facility's quarterly direct care component rate as
follows:

(i) Any facility whose
allowable cost per case mix unit is less than ninety percent of the facility's
peer group median established under (f) of this subsection shall be assigned a
cost per case mix unit equal to ninety percent of the facility's peer group median,
and shall have a direct care component rate allocation equal to the facility's
assigned cost per case mix unit multiplied by that facility's medicaid average
case mix index from the applicable quarter specified in RCW 74.46.501(7)(c);

(ii) Any facility whose
allowable cost per case mix unit is greater than one hundred ten percent of the
peer group median established under (f) of this subsection shall be assigned a
cost per case mix unit equal to one hundred ten percent of the peer group
median, and shall have a direct care component rate allocation equal to the
facility's assigned cost per case mix unit multiplied by that facility's
medicaid average case mix index from the applicable quarter specified in RCW
74.46.501(7)(c);

(iii) Any facility
whose allowable cost per case mix unit is between ninety and one hundred ten
percent of the peer group median established under (f) of this subsection shall
have a direct care component rate allocation equal to the facility's allowable
cost per case mix unit multiplied by that facility's medicaid average case mix
index from the applicable quarter specified in RCW 74.46.501(7)(c);

(i)(i) Between October
1, 1998, and June 30, 2000, the department shall compare each facility's direct
care component rate allocation calculated under (g) of this subsection with the
facility's nursing services component rate in effect on September 30, 1998,
less therapy costs, plus any exceptional care offsets as reported on the cost
report, adjusted for economic trends and conditions as provided in RCW
74.46.431. A facility shall receive the higher of the two rates.

(ii) Between July 1,
2000, and June 30, 2002, the department shall compare each facility's direct
care component rate allocation calculated under (h) of this subsection with the
facility's direct care component rate in effect on June 30, 2000. A facility
shall receive the higher of the two rates. Between July 1, 2001, and June 30,
2002, if during any quarter a facility whose rate paid under (h) of this
subsection is greater than either the direct care rate in effect on June 30,
2000, or than that facility's allowable direct care cost per case mix unit
calculated in (d) of this subsection multiplied by that facility's medicaid
average case mix index from the applicable quarter specified in RCW
74.46.501(7)(c), the facility shall be paid in that and each subsequent quarter
pursuant to (h) of this subsection and shall not be entitled to the greater of
the two rates.

(iii) Effective July 1,
2002, all direct care component rate allocations shall be as determined under
(h) of this subsection.

(6) The direct care
component rate allocations calculated in accordance with this section shall be
adjusted to the extent necessary to comply with RCW 74.46.421.

(7) Payments resulting
from increases in direct care component rates, granted under authority of RCW
74.46.508(1) for a facility's exceptional care residents, shall be offset
against the facility's examined, allowable direct care costs, for each report
year or partial period such increases are paid. Such reductions in allowable
direct care costs shall be for rate setting, settlement, and other purposes
deemed appropriate by the department.

Sec. 13. RCW 74.46.511 and 2001
1st sp.s. c 8 s 11 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) The therapy care
component rate allocation corresponds to the provision of medicaid one-on-one
therapy provided by a qualified therapist as defined in this chapter, including
therapy supplies and therapy consultation, for one day for one medicaid
resident of a nursing facility. The therapy care component rate allocation for
October 1, 1998, through June 30, 2001, shall be based on adjusted therapy
costs and days from calendar year 1996. The therapy component rate allocation
for July 1, 2001, through June 30, 2004, shall be based on adjusted therapy
costs and days from calendar year 1999. The therapy care component rate shall
be adjusted for economic trends and conditions as specified in RCW
74.46.431(5)(b), and shall be determined in accordance with this section.

(2) In rebasing, as
provided in RCW 74.46.431(5)(a), the department shall take from the cost
reports of facilities the following reported information:

(a) Direct one-on-one
therapy charges for all residents by payer including charges for supplies;

(b) The total units or
modules of therapy care for all residents by type of therapy provided, for
example, speech or physical. A unit or module of therapy care is considered to
be fifteen minutes of one-on-one therapy provided by a qualified therapist or
support personnel; and

(c) Therapy consulting
expenses for all residents.

(3) The department
shall determine for all residents the total cost per unit of therapy for each
type of therapy by dividing the total adjusted one-on-one therapy expense for
each type by the total units provided for that therapy type.

(4) The department
shall divide medicaid nursing facilities in this state into two peer groups:

(a) Those facilities
located within urban counties; and

(b) Those located
within nonurban counties.

The department shall
array the facilities in each peer group from highest to lowest based on their
total cost per unit of therapy for each therapy type. The department shall
determine the median total cost per unit of therapy for each therapy type and
add ten percent of median total cost per unit of therapy. The cost per unit of
therapy for each therapy type at a nursing facility shall be the lesser of its
cost per unit of therapy for each therapy type or the median total cost per
unit plus ten percent for each therapy type for its peer group.

(5) The department
shall calculate each nursing facility's therapy care component rate allocation
as follows:

(a) To determine the
allowable total therapy cost for each therapy type, the allowable cost per unit
of therapy for each type of therapy shall be multiplied by the total therapy
units for each type of therapy;

(b) The medicaid
allowable one-on-one therapy expense shall be calculated taking the allowable
total therapy cost for each therapy type times the medicaid percent of total
therapy charges for each therapy type;

(c) The medicaid
allowable one-on-one therapy expense for each therapy type shall be divided by
total adjusted medicaid days to arrive at the medicaid one-on-one therapy cost
per patient day for each therapy type;

(d) The medicaid
one-on-one therapy cost per patient day for each therapy type shall be
multiplied by total adjusted patient days for all residents to calculate the
total allowable one-on-one therapy expense. The lesser of the total allowable
therapy consultant expense for the therapy type or a reasonable percentage of
allowable therapy consultant expense for each therapy type, as established in
rule by the department, shall be added to the total allowable one-on-one
therapy expense to determine the allowable therapy cost for each therapy type;

(e) The allowable
therapy cost for each therapy type shall be added together, the sum of which
shall be the total allowable therapy expense for the nursing facility;

(f) Effective July
1, 2002, the total allowable therapy expense will be divided by the greater
of adjusted total patient days from the cost report on which the therapy
expenses were reported((,)) or patient days at ((eighty-five)) ninety
percent occupancy of licensed beds. However, essential community providers
will have their imputed occupancy set using eighty-five percent. The
outcome shall be the nursing facility's therapy care component rate allocation.

(6) The therapy care
component rate allocations calculated in accordance with this section shall be
adjusted to the extent necessary to comply with RCW 74.46.421.

(7) The therapy care
component rate shall be suspended for medicaid residents in qualified nursing
facilities designated by the department who are receiving therapy paid by the
department outside the facility daily rate under RCW 74.46.508(2).

(8) The department
will adopt rules to equalize rates between nursing facilities based on the
ratio of medicaid residents receiving therapy care to private residents
receiving therapy care.

Sec. 14. RCW 74.46.515 and 2001
1st sp.s. c 8 s 12 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) The support
services component rate allocation corresponds to the provision of food, food
preparation, dietary, housekeeping, and laundry services for one resident for
one day.

(2) Beginning October
1, 1998, the department shall determine each medicaid nursing facility's
support services component rate allocation using cost report data specified by
RCW 74.46.431(6).

(3) To determine each
facility's support services component rate allocation, the department shall,
effective July 1, 2002:

(a) Divide each
facility's total allowable support services costs by the greater of its
adjusted resident days for the applicable cost report period or imputed
occupancy at ninety percent. However, essential community providers will have
their imputed occupancy set using eighty-five percent of licensed beds to
derive the facility's allowable support services costs per resident day;

(b) Array
facilities' adjusted support services costs per adjusted resident day for each
facility from facilities' cost reports from the applicable report year, for
facilities located within urban counties, and for those located within nonurban
counties and determine the median adjusted cost for each peer group;

(((b))) (c)
Set each facility's support services component rate at the lower of the
facility's per resident day adjusted support services costs from the applicable
cost report period or eighty-eight percent of the adjusted median per
resident day support services cost for that facility's peer group, either urban
counties or nonurban counties((, plus ten percent)); and

(((c))) (d)
Adjust each facility's support services component rate for economic trends and
conditions as provided in RCW 74.46.431(6).

(4) The support
services component rate allocations calculated in accordance with this section
shall be adjusted to the extent necessary to comply with RCW 74.46.421.

Sec. 15. RCW 74.46.521 and 2001
1st sp.s. c 8 s 13 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) The operations
component rate allocation corresponds to the general operation of a nursing
facility for one resident for one day, including but not limited to management,
administration, utilities, office supplies, accounting and bookkeeping, minor
building maintenance, minor equipment repairs and replacements, and other
supplies and services, exclusive of direct care, therapy care, support
services, property, and financing allowance((, and variable return)).

(2) Beginning October
1, 1998, the department shall determine each medicaid nursing facility's
operations component rate allocation using cost report data specified by RCW
74.46.431(7)(a). Effective July 1, 2002, operations component rates for all
facilities except essential community providers shall be based upon a minimum
occupancy of ninety percent of licensed beds, and no operations component rate
shall be revised in response to beds banked on or after May 25, 2001, under
chapter 70.38 RCW.

(3) To determine each
facility's operations component rate the department shall:

(a) Array facilities'
adjusted general operations costs per adjusted resident day for each facility
from facilities' cost reports from the applicable report year, for facilities
located within urban counties and for those located within nonurban counties
and determine the median adjusted cost for each peer group;

(b) Set each facility's
operations component rate at the lower of:

(i) The facility's per
resident day adjusted operations costs from the applicable cost report period
adjusted if necessary to a minimum occupancy of eighty-five percent of licensed
beds before July 1, 2002, and ninety percent effective July 1, 2002; or

(ii) Eighty percent
of the adjusted median per resident day general operations cost for that
facility's peer group, urban counties or nonurban counties; and

(c) Adjust each
facility's operations component rate for economic trends and conditions as
provided in RCW 74.46.431(7)(b).

(4) The operations
component rate allocations calculated in accordance with this section shall be
adjusted to the extent necessary to comply with RCW 74.46.421.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 16. RCW 74.46.433 (Variable return component
rate allocation) and 2001 1st sp.s. c 8 s 6 & 1999 c 353 s 9 are each
repealed.

---
END ---