BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF
WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1. RCW 70.128.060 and 2001
c 193 s 9 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) An application for
license shall be made to the department upon forms provided by it and shall
contain such information as the department reasonably requires.

(2) The department
shall issue a license to an adult family home if the department finds that the
applicant and the home are in compliance with this chapter and the rules
adopted under this chapter, unless (a) the applicant has prior violations of
this chapter relating to the adult family home subject to the application or
any other adult family home, or of any other law regulating residential care
facilities within the past five years that resulted in revocation or nonrenewal
of a license; or (b) the applicant has a history of significant noncompliance
with federal, state, or local laws, rules, or regulations relating to the
provision of care or services to vulnerable adults or to children.

(3) The license fee
shall be submitted with the application.

(4) The department
shall serve upon the applicant a copy of the decision granting or denying an
application for a license. An applicant shall have the right to contest denial
of his or her application for a license as provided in chapter 34.05 RCW by requesting
a hearing in writing within twenty-eight days after receipt of the notice of
denial.

(5) The department
shall not issue a license to a provider if the department finds that the
provider or any partner, officer, director, managerial employee, or owner of
five percent or more if the provider has a history of significant noncompliance
with federal or state regulations, rules, or laws in providing care or services
to vulnerable adults or to children.

(6) The department
shall license an adult family home for the maximum level of care that the adult
family home may provide. The department shall define, in rule, license levels
based upon the education, training, and caregiving experience of the licensed
provider or staff.

(7) The department
shall establish, by rule, standards used to license nonresident providers and
multiple facility operators.

(8) The department
shall establish, by rule, for multiple facility operators educational standards
substantially equivalent to recognized national certification standards for
residential care administrators.

(9) The license fee
shall be set at ((fifty)) one hundred twenty-five dollars per
year for each home. A ((fifty)) one hundred twenty-five dollar
processing fee shall also be charged each home when the home is initially
licensed.

(10) A provider who
receives notification of the department's initiation of a denial, suspension,
nonrenewal, or revocation of an adult family home license may, in lieu of
appealing the department's action, surrender or relinquish the license. The
department shall not issue a new license to or contract with the provider, for
the purposes of providing care to vulnerable adults or children, for a period
of twenty years following the surrendering or relinquishment of the former
license. The licensing record shall indicate that the provider relinquished or
surrendered the license, without admitting the violations, after receiving
notice of the department's initiation of a denial, suspension, nonrenewal, or
revocation of a license.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
2. A new section is added
to chapter 70.128 RCW to read as follows:

No
department employee shall discriminate or retaliate in any manner against an
adult family home operator or employee on the basis or for the reason that the
operator or employee made a complaint against the department or any of its
employees.

---
END ---