BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF
WASHINGTON:

PART I

GENERAL GOVERNMENT

Sec. 101. 2001 2nd sp.s. c 7 s 101
(uncodified) is amended to read as follows:

FOR THE HOUSE OF REPRESENTATIVES

General Fund‑-State
Appropriation (FY 2002).... $ 28,313,000

General Fund‑-State
Appropriation (FY 2003).... $ ((28,497,000))

27,072,000

Department of Retirement
Systems Expense Account‑-

State Appropriation........................ $ 45,000

TOTAL
APPROPRIATION................. $ ((56,855,000))

55,430,000

The appropriations in
this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations:

(1) $25,000 of the
general fund‑-state appropriation is provided solely for allocation to
Project Citizen, a program of the national conference of state legislatures to
promote student civic involvement.

(2) $15,000 of the
general fund‑‑state appropriation for fiscal year 2002 is provided
for the legislature to continue the services of expert counsel on legal and
policy issues relating to services for persons with developmental disabilities.

Sec. 102. 2001 2nd sp.s. c 7 s 102
(uncodified) is amended to read as follows:

FOR THE SENATE

General Fund‑-State
Appropriation (FY 2002).... $ 22,863,000

General Fund‑-State
Appropriation (FY 2003).... $ ((23,999,000))

22,799,000

Department of Retirement
Systems Expense Account‑-

State Appropriation........................ $ 45,000

TOTAL
APPROPRIATION................. $ ((46,907,000))

45,707,000

The appropriations in
this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations:

(1) $25,000 of the
general fund‑-state appropriation is provided solely for allocation to
Project Citizen, a program of the national conference of state legislatures to
promote student civic involvement.

(2) $15,000 of the
general fund‑‑state appropriation for fiscal year 2002 is provided
for the legislature to continue the services of expert counsel on legal and
policy issues relating to services for persons with developmental disabilities.

Sec. 103. 2001 2nd sp.s. c 7 s 103
(uncodified) is amended to read as follows:

FOR THE JOINT LEGISLATIVE AUDIT
AND REVIEW COMMITTEE

General Fund‑-State
Appropriation (FY 2002).... $ ((2,436,000))

2,166,000

General Fund‑-State
Appropriation (FY 2003).... $ ((1,938,000))

2,150,000

TOTAL
APPROPRIATION................. $ ((4,374,000))

4,316,000

The appropriations in
this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations:

(1) (($150,000 of
the general fund‑-state appropriation for fiscal year 2002 and $75,000 of
the general fund‑-state appropriation for fiscal year 2003 are provided
solely for the joint legislative audit and review committee to conduct an
evaluation of the client outcomes of the high school transition program
operated by the department of social and health services division of
developmental disabilities. The study shall identify the different approaches
that have been used in providing transition services and whether some
approaches are more or less successful in helping young adults with
developmental disabilities achieve greater levels of independence. The study
shall evaluate how transition programs reduce the level of support provided to
clients as they achieve greater levels of independence, and shall be submitted
to the appropriate committees of the legislature by December 1, 2002.)) $130,000
of the general fund‑-state appropriation for fiscal year 2002 and
$470,000 of the general fund‑-state appropriation for fiscal year 2003
are provided solely for conducting a performance audit of the department of
social and health services division of developmental disabilities. The audit
shall determine whether the division has complied with significant laws and
regulations applicable to the program and evaluate the adequacy of management
processes for measuring, reporting, and monitoring program effectiveness,
economy, and efficiency.

(a) Special emphasis
shall be placed on how the division:

(i) Determines and
monitors eligibility;

(ii) Determines what
types and levels of services are to be provided;

(iii) Determines
that clients are receiving services;

(iv) Tracks client
progress and evaluates the benefits of services being provided;

(v) Enforces the
terms of its contracts with providers; and

(vi) Determines it
is doing an efficient and effective job of meeting its legislative mandates.

(b) The audit shall
also include a comparison among the division of developmental disabilities and
other program areas in the department of social and health services that
deliver similar client services. This comparison shall cover eligibility
assessment, functional needs assessment, service requirements assessment, and
the linkage between assessed client needs and the agency services authorized
and delivered.

(c) The committee
shall make recommendations, as appropriate, for the improvement of services and
system performance. The committee may contract for consulting services in
conducting the study. Interim findings shall be submitted to the fiscal
committees of the legislature by December 1, 2002. The final report shall be
submitted to the legislature no later than June 30, 2003.

(2) $50,000 of the
general fund‑-state appropriation for fiscal year 2002 is provided solely
for the joint legislative audit and review committee to conduct a capacity
planning study of the capital facilities of the state school for the deaf. The
committee's study shall be carried out in conjunction with the study of
educational service delivery models conducted by the state institute for public
policy. The study shall be submitted to the fiscal committees of the
legislature by September 30, 2002.

(3) $35,000 of the
general fund--state appropriation for fiscal year 2002 is provided solely for
the joint legislative audit and review committee to conduct a review of water
conservancy boards. The review shall include an assessment of the operating
costs of existing boards; the sources of funding for board operations; sources
of in-kind support for board operations; assessment of the value of water
rights subject to change or transfer decisions; the range of costs of
processing water right transfer applications by the boards as well as by the
department of ecology for applications filed directly with the department; the
costs to the department of training, assistance, and review of board
recommendations on applications; board membership and board recordkeeping; and
public participation procedures for both the water conservancy boards and the
department of ecology. The committee shall submit its review by January 1,
2003, to the appropriate policy and fiscal committees of the legislature.

(4) $40,000 of the
general fund--state appropriation for fiscal year 2002 is provided solely for a
follow-up review to report number 98-3, the performance audit of the department
of corrections. The follow-up study shall include but not be limited to a
review of:

(a) Community
supervision activities performed by the department;

(b) The implementation
of risk-based classification and community placement models;

(c) The early
implementation of the offender accountability act; and

(d) The cost impacts of
the risk-based models and the offender accountability act.

The committee shall
consult with the Washington state institute for public policy regarding data
and findings from the institute's current studies on these issues. A report of
the follow-up study shall be submitted to the relevant policy and fiscal
committees of the legislature by December 21, 2001. Upon the completion of the
follow-up review, the committee shall make a determination whether an
additional phase of study is needed. If further study is indicated, the
committee shall submit to the relevant policy and fiscal committees of the
legislature its plan and cost estimate for such study by March 29, 2002.

(5) $140,000 of the
general fund‑-state appropriation for fiscal year 2002 is provided for a
study of children's mental health in Washington. The study shall include but
not be limited to:

(a) A review of plans
and services for children, including those for early periodic screening,
diagnosis, and treatment;

(b) A review of the
implementation of the plans;

(c) A review of the
availability and reliability of fiscal, program, and outcome data relating to
mental health services provided to children; and

(d) A survey of mental
health services for children among the state's regional support networks.

The committee shall
make recommendations, as appropriate, for the improvement of services and
system performance, including the need for performance and client outcome
measures. The committee may contract for consulting services in conducting the
study. The committee shall submit a report to the appropriate policy and
fiscal committees of the legislature by July 1, 2002.

(6) Within the amounts
provided in this section, the joint legislative audit and review committee
shall conduct a study of the Washington management service. The study shall
include findings regarding (a) growth in the number of positions in the
Washington management service, (b) growth in salary levels and structure since
the Washington management service's inception, and (c) other compensation practices
used within the Washington management service. The department of personnel
shall cooperate with the committee in conducting the study and provide
information as requested by the committee. The committee shall provide a
report to the fiscal committees of the legislature by December 31, 2001.

(7) Within the amounts
provided in this section, the joint legislative audit and review committee
shall review all aspects of the mental health prevalence study completed in
accordance with section 204 of this act, including but not limited to the
contractor selection process, if any; the study design and workplan; the
implementation of the study; and the draft and final reports.

(8) The committee shall
study and report on pipeline safety as provided in section 149 of this act.

Sec. 104. 2001 2nd sp.s. c 7 s 104
(uncodified) is amended to read as follows:

FOR THE LEGISLATIVE EVALUATION
AND ACCOUNTABILITY PROGRAM COMMITTEE

General Fund‑-State
Appropriation (FY 2002).... $ 1,329,000

General Fund‑-State
Appropriation (FY 2003).... $ ((1,462,000))

1,418,000

Public Works Assistance
Account‑-State

Appropriation.............................. $ 203,000

TOTAL
APPROPRIATION................. $ ((2,994,000))

2,950,000

Sec. 105. 2001 2nd sp.s. c 7 s 105
(uncodified) is amended to read as follows:

FOR THE OFFICE OF THE STATE
ACTUARY

Department of Retirement
Systems Expense Account‑-

State Appropriation........................ $ ((1,923,000))

2,054,000

The appropriation in
this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations: The joint
committee on pension policy, in collaboration with various interested parties,
shall study issues of pension governance and recommend legislation for
consideration in the 2002 legislative session.

Sec. 106. 2001 2nd sp.s. c 7 s 106
(uncodified) is amended to read as follows:

FOR THE JOINT LEGISLATIVE
SYSTEMS COMMITTEE

General Fund‑-State
Appropriation (FY 2002).... $ 6,421,000

General Fund‑-State
Appropriation (FY 2003).... $ ((7,043,000))

6,832,000

TOTAL
APPROPRIATION................. $ ((13,464,000))

13,253,000

Sec. 107. 2001 2nd sp.s. c 7 s 107
(uncodified) is amended to read as follows:

FOR THE STATUTE LAW COMMITTEE

General Fund‑-State
Appropriation (FY 2002).... $ 3,909,000

General Fund‑-State
Appropriation (FY 2003).... $ ((4,038,000))

3,917,000

TOTAL
APPROPRIATION................. $ ((7,947,000))

7,826,000

The appropriations in
this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations: $41,000
of the general fund fiscal year 2002 appropriation and $43,000 of the general
fund fiscal year 2003 appropriation are provided solely for the uniform legislation
commission.

Sec. 108. 2001 2nd sp.s. c 7 s 109
(uncodified) is amended to read as follows:

FOR THE SUPREME COURT

General Fund‑-State
Appropriation (FY 2002).... $ ((5,423,000))

5,500,000

General Fund‑-State
Appropriation (FY 2003).... $ ((5,510,000))

5,487,000

TOTAL
APPROPRIATION................. $ ((10,933,000))

10,987,000

Sec. 109. 2001 2nd sp.s. c 7 s 110
(uncodified) is amended to read as follows:

FOR THE LAW LIBRARY

General Fund‑-State
Appropriation (FY 2002).... $ 1,982,000

General Fund‑-State
Appropriation (FY 2003).... $ ((1,983,000))

1,924,000

TOTAL
APPROPRIATION................. $ ((3,965,000))

3,906,000

Sec. 110. 2001 2nd sp.s. c 7 s 111
(uncodified) is amended to read as follows:

FOR THE COURT OF APPEALS

General Fund‑-State
Appropriation (FY 2002).... $ ((12,746,000))

12,894,000

General Fund‑-State
Appropriation (FY 2003).... $ ((12,878,000))

12,724,000

TOTAL
APPROPRIATION................. $ ((25,624,000))

25,618,000

The appropriations in
this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations:

(1) $505,000 of the
general fund‑-state appropriation for fiscal year 2002 and $606,000 of
the general fund‑-state appropriation for fiscal year 2003 are provided
solely for lease increases associated with the division I facility. ((Within
the funds provided in this subsection, the court of appeals shall conduct a
space planning study exploring options dealing with remodeling existing space
to accommodate needs and evaluating the cost and benefits of moving to another
location.))

(2) $168,000 of the
general fund‑-state appropriation for fiscal year 2002 and $159,000 of
the general fund‑-state appropriation for fiscal year 2003 are provided
solely for providing compensation adjustments to nonjudicial staff of the court
of appeals. Within the funds provided in this subsection, the court of appeals
shall determine the specific positions to receive compensation adjustments
based on recruitment and retention difficulties, new duties or responsibilities
assigned, and salary inversion or compression within the court of appeals.

Sec. 111. 2001 2nd sp.s. c 7 s 112
(uncodified) is amended to read as follows:

FOR THE COMMISSION ON JUDICIAL
CONDUCT

General Fund‑-State
Appropriation (FY 2002).... $ 955,000

General Fund‑-State
Appropriation (FY 2003).... $ ((969,000))

940,000

TOTAL
APPROPRIATION................. $ ((1,924,000))

1,895,000

Sec. 112. 2001 2nd sp.s. c 7 s 113
(uncodified) is amended to read as follows:

FOR THE ADMINISTRATOR FOR THE
COURTS

General Fund‑-State
Appropriation (FY 2002).... $ ((14,247,000))

14,900,000

General Fund‑-State
Appropriation (FY 2003).... $ ((14,386,000))

14,956,000

Public Safety and Education
Account‑-State

Appropriation.............................. $ ((29,634,000))

27,507,000

Judicial Information
Systems Account‑-State

Appropriation.............................. $ 27,758,000

TOTAL
APPROPRIATION................. $ ((86,025,000))

85,121,000

The appropriations in
this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations:

(1) Funding provided in
the judicial information systems account appropriation shall be used for the
operations and maintenance of technology systems that improve services provided
by the supreme court, the court of appeals, the office of public defense, and
the administrator for the courts.

(2) No moneys
appropriated in this section may be expended by the administrator for the
courts for payments in excess of fifty percent of the employer contribution on
behalf of superior court judges for insurance and health care plans and federal
social security and medicare and medical aid benefits. As required by Article
IV, section 13 of the state Constitution and 1996 Attorney General's Opinion
No. 2, it is the intent of the legislature that the costs of these employer
contributions shall be shared equally between the state and county or counties
in which the judges serve. The administrator for the courts shall continue to
implement procedures for the collection and disbursement of these employer
contributions. During each fiscal year in the 2001-03 biennium, the office of
the administrator for the courts shall send written notice to the office of
community development in the department of community, trade, and economic
development when each county pays its fifty percent share for the year.

(3) $223,000 of the
public safety and education account appropriation is provided solely for the
gender and justice commission.

(4) $308,000 of the
public safety and education account appropriation is provided solely for the
minority and justice commission.

(5) $278,000 of the
general fund‑-state appropriation for fiscal year 2002, $285,000 of the
general fund‑-state appropriation for fiscal year 2003, and $263,000 of
the public safety and education account appropriation are provided solely for
the workload associated with tax warrants and other state cases filed in
Thurston county.

(6) $750,000 of the
general fund‑-state appropriation for fiscal year 2002 and $750,000 of
the general fund‑-state appropriation for fiscal year 2003 are provided
solely for court-appointed special advocates in dependency matters. The
administrator for the courts, after consulting with the association of juvenile
court administrators and the association of court-appointed special
advocate/guardian ad litem programs, shall distribute the funds to volunteer
court-appointed special advocate/guardian ad litem programs. The distribution
of funding shall be based on the number of children who need volunteer
court-appointed special advocate representation and shall be equally accessible
to all volunteer court-appointed special advocate/guardian ad litem programs.
The administrator for the courts shall not retain more than six percent of
total funding to cover administrative or any other agency costs.

(7) (($750,000 of
the public safety and education account‑-state appropriation is provided
solely for judicial program enhancements. Within the funding provided in this
subsection, the administrator for the courts, in consultation with the supreme
court, shall determine the program or programs to receive an enhancement. Among
the programs that may be funded from the amount provided in this subsection are
unified family courts.

(8) $1,618,000 of
the public safety and education account‑-state appropriation is provided
solely for increases for juror pay. The office of the administrator for the
courts may contract with local governments to provide additional juror pay.
The contract shall provide that the local government is responsible for the
first ten dollars of juror compensation for each day or partial day of jury
service, and the state shall reimburse the local government for any additional
compensation, excluding the first day, up to a maximum of fifteen dollars per
day.)) $1,800,000 of the
judicial information systems account‑-state appropriation is provided
solely for improvements and enhancements to the judicial information systems.
This funding shall only be expended after the office of the administrator for
the courts certifies to the office of financial management that there will be
at least a $1,000,000 ending fund balance in the judicial information systems
account at the end of the 2001-03 biennium.

Sec. 113. 2001 2nd sp.s. c 7 s 114
(uncodified) is amended to read as follows:

FOR THE OFFICE OF PUBLIC DEFENSE

General Fund‑-State
Appropriation (FY 2002).... $ 600,000

General Fund‑-State
Appropriation (FY 2003).... $ 500,000

Public Safety and Education
Account‑-State

Appropriation.............................. $ ((12,626,000))

12,269,000

TOTAL
APPROPRIATION................. $ ((13,226,000))

13,369,000

The appropriations in
this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations:

(1) (($233,000))
$209,000 of the public safety and education account appropriation is
provided solely to increase the reimbursement for private attorneys providing
constitutionally mandated indigent defense in nondeath penalty cases.

(2) $51,000 of the
public safety and education account appropriation is provided solely for the
implementation of chapter 303, Laws of 1999 (court funding).

(3) Amounts provided
from the public safety and education account appropriation in this section
include funding for investigative services in death penalty personal restraint
petitions.

(4) The entire general
fund‑-state appropriation is provided solely for the continuation of a
dependency and termination legal representation funding pilot program.

(a) The goal of the
pilot program shall be to enhance the quality of legal representation in
dependency and termination hearings, thereby reducing the number of continuances
requested by contract attorneys, including those based on the unavailability of
defense counsel. To meet the goal, the pilot shall include the following
components:

(i) A maximum caseload
requirement of 90 dependency and termination cases per full-time attorney;

(ii) Implementation of
enhanced defense attorney practice standards, including but not limited to
those related to reasonable case preparation and the delivery of adequate
client advice, as developed by Washington state public defense attorneys and
included in the office of public defense December 1999 report Costs of
Defense and Children's Representation in Dependency and Termination Hearings;

(iii) Use of
investigative and expert services in appropriate cases; and

(iv) Effective
implementation of indigency screening of all dependency and termination
parents, guardians, and legal custodians represented by appointed counsel.

(b) The pilot program
shall be established in one eastern and one western Washington juvenile court.

(c) The director shall
contract for an independent evaluation of the pilot program benefits and
costs. A final evaluation shall be submitted to the governor and the fiscal
committees of the legislature no later than February 1, 2002.

(d) The chair of the
office of public defense advisory committee shall appoint an implementation
committee to:

(i) Develop criteria
for a statewide program to improve dependency and termination defense;

(ii) Examine caseload
impacts to the courts resulting from improved defense practices; and

(iii) Identify methods
for the efficient use of expert services and means by which parents may
effectively access services.

If sufficient funds are
available, the office of public defense shall contract with the Washington
state institute for public policy to research how reducing dependency and
termination case delays affects foster care and to identify factors that are
reducing the number of family reunifications that occur in dependency and
termination cases.

(5) $50,000 of the
public safety and education account‑-state appropriation is provided
solely for the evaluation required in chapter 92, Laws of 2000 (DNA testing).

(6) (($235,000))
$135,000 of the public safety and education account‑-state
appropriation is provided solely for the office of public defense to contract
with an existing public defender association to establish a capital defense
assistance center.

Sec. 114. 2001 2nd sp.s. c 7 s 115
(uncodified) is amended to read as follows:

FOR THE OFFICE OF THE GOVERNOR

General Fund‑-State
Appropriation (FY 2002).... $ 4,537,000

General Fund‑-State
Appropriation (FY 2003).... $ ((4,524,000))

4,298,000

General Fund‑-Federal
Appropriation............. $ 219,000

Water Quality Account‑-State

Appropriation.............................. $ 3,908,000

TOTAL
APPROPRIATION................. $ ((13,188,000))

12,962,000

The appropriations in
this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations:

(1) $3,908,000 of the
water quality account appropriation and $219,000 of the general fund‑-federal
appropriation are provided solely for the Puget Sound water quality action team
to implement the Puget Sound work plan and agency action items PSAT-01 through
PSAT-05.

(2) $100,000 of the
general fund‑-state appropriation for fiscal year 2002 and $100,000 of
the general fund‑-state appropriation for fiscal year 2003 are provided
solely for the salmon recovery office to support the efforts of the independent
science panel.

(3) $500,000 of the
general fund‑-state appropriation for fiscal year 2003 is provided solely
for implementation of Engrossed Second Substitute House Bill No. 2671 (permit
assistance center). If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2002, the amount
provided in this subsection shall lapse.

Sec. 115. 2001 2nd sp.s. c 7 s 116
(uncodified) is amended to read as follows:

FOR THE LIEUTENANT GOVERNOR

General Fund‑-State
Appropriation (FY 2002).... $ 449,000

General Fund‑-State
Appropriation (FY 2003).... $ ((451,000))

428,000

TOTAL
APPROPRIATION................. $ ((900,000))

877,000

Sec. 116. 2001 2nd sp.s. c 7 s 117
(uncodified) is amended to read as follows:

FOR THE PUBLIC DISCLOSURE
COMMISSION

General Fund‑-State
Appropriation (FY 2002).... $ 1,910,000

General Fund‑-State
Appropriation (FY 2003).... $ ((1,903,000))

1,846,000

TOTAL
APPROPRIATION................. $ ((3,813,000))

3,756,000

Sec. 117. 2001 2nd sp.s. c 7 s 118
(uncodified) is amended to read as follows:

FOR THE SECRETARY OF STATE

General Fund‑-State
Appropriation (FY 2002).... $ ((10,513,000))

10,175,000

General Fund‑-State
Appropriation (FY 2003).... $ ((8,707,000))

6,252,000

Archives and Records
Management Account‑-State

Appropriation.............................. $ ((7,295,000))

7,877,000

Archives and Records
Management Account‑-Private/

Local Appropriation........................ $ ((3,860,000))

4,572,000

Department of Personnel
Service Account

Appropriation.............................. $ ((719,000))

701,000

TOTAL
APPROPRIATION................. $ ((31,094,000))

29,577,000

The appropriations in
this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations:

(1) (($2,296,000))
$1,796,000 of the general fund‑-state appropriation for fiscal
year 2002 is provided solely to reimburse counties for the state's share of
primary and general election costs and the costs of conducting mandatory
recounts on state measures. Counties shall be reimbursed only for those
odd-year election costs that the secretary of state validates as eligible for
reimbursement.

(2) (($2,193,000))
$2,143,000 of the general fund‑-state appropriation for fiscal
year 2002 and (($2,712,000)) $2,578,000 of the general fund‑-state
appropriation for fiscal year 2003 are provided solely for the verification of
initiative and referendum petitions, maintenance of related voter registration
records, and the publication and distribution of the voters and candidates
pamphlet.

(3) $125,000 of the
general fund‑-state appropriation for fiscal year 2002 and (($125,000))
$118,000 of the general fund‑-state appropriation for fiscal year
2003 are provided solely for legal advertising of state measures under RCW
29.27.072.

(4)(a) $1,944,004 of
the general fund‑-state appropriation for fiscal year 2002 and $1,986,772
of the general fund‑-state appropriation for fiscal year 2003 are
provided solely for contracting with a nonprofit organization to produce
gavel-to-gavel television coverage of state government deliberations and other
events of statewide significance during the 2001-2003 biennium. An eligible
nonprofit organization must be formed solely for the purpose of, and be
experienced in, providing gavel-to-gavel television coverage of state
government deliberations and other events of statewide significance and must
have received a determination of tax-exempt status under section 501(c)(3) of
the federal internal revenue code. The funding level for each year of the contract
shall be based on the amount provided in this subsection and adjusted to
reflect the implicit price deflator for the previous year. The nonprofit
organization shall be required to raise contributions or commitments to make
contributions, in cash or in kind, in an amount equal to forty percent of the
state contribution. The office of the secretary of state may make full or
partial payment once all criteria in (a) and (b) of this subsection have been
satisfactorily documented.

(b) The legislature finds
that the commitment of on-going funding is necessary to ensure continuous,
autonomous, and independent coverage of public affairs. For that purpose, the
secretary of state shall enter into a four-year contract with the nonprofit
organization to provide public affairs coverage through June 30, 2006.

(c) The nonprofit
organization shall prepare an annual independent audit, an annual financial
statement, and an annual report, including benchmarks that measure the success
of the nonprofit organization in meeting the intent of the program.

(d) No portion of any
amounts disbursed pursuant to this subsection may be used, directly or
indirectly, for any of the following purposes:

(i) Attempting to
influence the passage or defeat of any legislation by the legislature of the
state of Washington, by any county, city, town, or other political subdivision
of the state of Washington, or by the congress, or the adoption or rejection of
any rule, standard, rate, or other legislative enactment of any state agency;

(ii) Making
contributions reportable under chapter 42.17 RCW; or

(iii) Providing any:
(A) Gift; (B) honoraria; or (C) travel, lodging, meals, or entertainment to a
public officer or employee.

(5)(a) $149,316 of the
archives and records management‑-state appropriation and $597,266 of the
archives and records management‑-private/local appropriation are provided
solely for the construction of an eastern regional archives. The amounts
provided in this subsection shall lapse if:

(i) The financing
contract for the construction of an eastern regional archives building is not
authorized in the capital budget for the 2001-03 fiscal biennium; or

(ii) Substitute House
Bill No. 1926 (increasing the surcharge on county auditor recording fees) is
not enacted by July 31, 2001.

(b) (($613,879))
$566,879 of the archives and records management‑-state
appropriation and (($463,102)) $451,102 of the archives and
records management‑-private/local appropriation are provided solely for
the design and establishment of an electronic data archive, including the
acquisition of hardware and software. The amounts provided in this subsection
shall lapse if:

(i) The financing
contract for acquisition of technology hardware and software for the electronic
data archive is not authorized in the capital budget for the 2001-03 fiscal
biennium; or

(ii) Substitute House
Bill No. 1926 (increasing the surcharge on county auditor recording fees) is not
enacted by June 30, 2001.

(6) If the financing
contract for expansion of the state records center is not authorized in the
capital budget for fiscal biennium 2001-03, then $641,000 of the archives and
records management account‑-state appropriation shall lapse.

(7) (($867,000))
$1,635,000 of the archives and records management account‑-state
appropriation is provided solely for operation of the central microfilming
bureau under RCW 40.14.020(8).

Sec. 118. 2001 2nd sp.s. c 7 s 119
(uncodified) is amended to read as follows:

FOR THE GOVERNOR'S OFFICE OF
INDIAN AFFAIRS

General Fund‑-State
Appropriation (FY 2002).... $ 269,000

General Fund‑-State
Appropriation (FY 2003).... $ ((282,000))

274,000

TOTAL
APPROPRIATION................. $ ((551,000))

543,000

Sec. 119. 2001 2nd sp.s. c 7 s 120
(uncodified) is amended to read as follows:

FOR THE COMMISSION ON
ASIAN-AMERICAN AFFAIRS

General Fund‑-State
Appropriation (FY 2002).... $ 233,000

General Fund‑-State
Appropriation (FY 2003).... $ ((233,000))

201,000

TOTAL
APPROPRIATION................. $ ((466,000))

434,000

Sec. 120. 2001 2nd sp.s. c 7 s 121
(uncodified) is amended to read as follows:

FOR THE STATE TREASURER

State Treasurer's Service
Account‑-State

Appropriation.............................. $ ((12,870,000))

12,548,000

Sec. 121. 2001 2nd sp.s. c 7 s 123
(uncodified) is amended to read as follows:

FOR THE STATE AUDITOR

General Fund‑-State
Appropriation (FY 2002).... $ ((1,078,000))

875,000

General Fund‑-State
Appropriation (FY 2003).... $ ((1,324,000))

963,000

State Auditing Services
Revolving Account‑-State

Appropriation.............................. $ ((13,540,000))

13,193,000

TOTAL
APPROPRIATION................. $ ((15,942,000))

15,031,000

The appropriations in
this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations:

(1) Audits of school
districts by the division of municipal corporations shall include findings
regarding the accuracy of: (a) Student enrollment data; and (b) the experience
and education of the district's certified instructional staff, as reported to
the superintendent of public instruction for allocation of state funding.

(2) (($910,000))
$875,000 of the general fund‑-state appropriation for fiscal year
2002 and (($910,000)) $876,000 of the general fund‑-state
appropriation for fiscal year 2003 are provided solely for staff and related
costs to verify the accuracy of reported school district data submitted for
state funding purposes; conduct school district program audits of state funded
public school programs; establish the specific amount of state funding
adjustments whenever audit exceptions occur and the amount is not firmly
established in the course of regular public school audits; and to assist the
state special education safety net committee when requested.

(3) $87,000 of the
general fund‑-state appropriation for fiscal year 2003 is provided solely
to implement House Bill No. 2563 (creating the governor's performance audit
standards and scorecard commission) which includes a requirement that the state
auditor conduct a pilot performance audit of the department of agriculture. If
House Bill No. 2563 is not enacted by June 30, 2002, the amount provided in
this subsection shall lapse.

Sec. 122. 2001 2nd sp.s. c 7 s 124
(uncodified) is amended to read as follows:

FOR THE CITIZENS' COMMISSION ON
SALARIES FOR ELECTED OFFICIALS

General Fund‑-State
Appropriation (FY 2002).... $ 80,000

General Fund‑-State
Appropriation (FY 2003).... $ ((152,000))

147,000

TOTAL APPROPRIATION................. $ ((232,000))

227,000

Sec. 123. 2001 2nd sp.s. c 7 s 125
(uncodified) is amended to read as follows:

FOR THE ATTORNEY GENERAL

General Fund‑-State
Appropriation (FY 2002).... $ 4,811,000

General Fund‑-State
Appropriation (FY 2003).... $ ((4,806,000))

2,081,000

General Fund‑-Federal
Appropriation............. $.................................. 2,868,000

Public Safety and Education
Account‑-State

Appropriation.............................. $ ((1,789,000))

1,756,000

Tobacco Prevention and
Control Account

Appropriation.............................. $ 277,000

New Motor Vehicle
Arbitration Account‑-State

Appropriation.............................. $ 1,163,000

Legal Services Revolving
Account‑-State

Appropriation.............................. $ ((147,306,000))

183,307,000

TOTAL
APPROPRIATION................. $ ((163,020,000))

196,263,000

The appropriations in
this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations:

(1) The attorney
general shall report each fiscal year on actual legal services expenditures and
actual attorney staffing levels for each agency receiving legal services. The
report shall be submitted to the office of financial management and the fiscal
committees of the senate and house of representatives no later than ninety days
after the end of each fiscal year.

(2) The attorney
general and the office of financial management shall modify the attorney
general billing system to meet the needs of user agencies for greater
predictability, timeliness, and explanation of how legal services are being
used by the agency. The attorney general shall provide the following
information each month to agencies receiving legal services: (a) The full-time
equivalent attorney services provided for the month; (b) the full-time equivalent
investigator services provided for the month; (c) the full-time equivalent
paralegal services provided for the month; and (d) direct legal costs, such as
filing and docket fees, charged to the agency for the month.

(3) Prior to entering
into any negotiated settlement of a claim against the state, that exceeds five
million dollars, the attorney general shall notify the director of financial
management and the chairs of the senate committee on ways and means and the
house of representatives committee on appropriations.

(4) $38,087,000 of
the legal services revolving account‑-state appropriation is provided
solely for tort defense legal services that are to be reimbursed through the
liability account or its successor. The appropriation from the legal services
revolving fund account‑-state in this section has been increased by
$38,087,000 to reflect the fact that the office of the attorney general shall
begin billing its costs for tort defense legal services through the legal
services revolving account‑-state.

(5) $916,000 of the
general fund‑‑state appropriation for fiscal year 2003 is provided
solely for funding consumer protection activities. Other funding for the
consumer protection division in fiscal year 2003 shall be provided from the
nonappropriated antitrust revolving account.

Sec. 124. 2001 2nd sp.s. c 7 s 126
(uncodified) is amended to read as follows:

FOR THE CASELOAD FORECAST
COUNCIL

General Fund‑-State
Appropriation (FY 2002).... $ 631,000

General Fund‑-State
Appropriation (FY 2003).... $ ((619,000))

600,000

TOTAL
APPROPRIATION................. $ ((1,250,000))

1,231,000

NEW SECTION. Sec.
125. A new section is added
to 2001 2nd sp.s. c 7 (uncodified) to read as follows:

FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF FINANCIAL
INSTITUTIONS. The department of
financial institutions shall reduce its fiscal year 2003 expenditures from the
financial services regulation account by the amount of $357,000.

Sec. 126. 2001 2nd sp.s. c 7 s 127
(uncodified) is amended to read as follows:

FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF COMMUNITY,
TRADE, AND ECONOMIC DEVELOPMENT

General Fund‑-State
Appropriation (FY 2002).... $ ((71,083,500))

69,708,000

General Fund‑-State
Appropriation (FY 2003).... $ ((70,873,500))

61,303,000

General Fund‑-Federal
Appropriation............. $.................................. 173,342,000

General Fund‑-Private/Local
Appropriation...... $ 7,980,000

Public Safety and Education
Account‑-State

Appropriation.............................. $ ((10,300,000))

10,108,000

Public Works Assistance
Account‑-State

Appropriation.............................. $ 1,911,000

Salmon Recovery Account‑-State

Appropriation.............................. $ 1,500,000

Film and Video Promotion
Account‑-State

Appropriation.............................. $ 25,000

Building Code Council
Account‑-State

Appropriation.............................. $ ((1,061,000))

1,226,000

Administrative Contingency
Account‑-State

Appropriation.............................. $ 1,777,000

Low-Income Weatherization
Assistance Account‑-State

Appropriation.............................. $ 3,292,000

Violence Reduction and Drug
Enforcement Account‑-

State Appropriation........................ $ 6,081,000

Manufactured Home
Installation Training Account‑-

State Appropriation........................ $ 256,000

Community Economic
Development Account‑-

State Appropriation........................ $ 113,000

Washington Housing Trust
Account‑-State

Appropriation.............................. $ ((5,597,000))

9,891,000

Public Facility
Construction Loan Revolving

Account‑-State
Appropriation............... $ ((550,000))

586,000

TOTAL
APPROPRIATION................. $ ((354,242,000))

349,099,000

The appropriations in
this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations:

(1)(a) It is the
intent of the legislature that the department of community, trade, and economic
development receive separate programmatic allotments for the office of
community development and the office of trade and economic development. Any
appropriation made to the department of community, trade, and economic
development for carrying out the powers, functions, and duties of either office
shall be credited to the appropriate office.

(b) If House Bill
No. 1474 (splitting CTED) is enacted by June 30, 2002, any appropriations made
to the department of community, trade, and economic development for carrying
out the powers, functions, and duties of either the department of community
development or the department of trade and economic development shall be
transferred and credited to the appropriate department. The director of
financial management shall make a determination as to the proper allocation and
certify that allocation to the state agencies concerned.

(2) $3,085,000 of the
general fund‑-state appropriation for fiscal year 2002 and (($3,085,000))
$2,838,000 of the general fund‑-state appropriation for fiscal
year 2003 are provided solely for a contract with the Washington technology
center. For work essential to the mission of the Washington technology center
and conducted in partnership with universities, the center shall not pay any
increased indirect rate nor increases in other indirect charges above the
absolute amount paid during the 1995-97 fiscal biennium.

(3) $61,000 of the
general fund‑-state appropriation for fiscal year 2002 and $62,000 of the
general fund‑-state appropriation for fiscal year 2003 are provided
solely for the implementation of the Puget Sound work plan and agency action
item OCD-01.

(4) $10,403,445 of the
general fund‑-federal appropriation is provided solely for the drug
control and system improvement formula grant program, to be distributed in
state fiscal year 2002 as follows:

(a) $3,603,250 to local
units of government to continue multijurisdictional narcotics task forces;

(b) $620,000 to the
department to continue the drug prosecution assistance program in support of
multijurisdictional narcotics task forces;

(c) $1,363,000 to the
Washington state patrol for coordination, investigative, and supervisory
support to the multijurisdictional narcotics task forces and for
methamphetamine education and response;

(d) $200,000 to the
department for grants to support tribal law enforcement needs;

(e) $991,000 to the
department of social and health services, division of alcohol and substance
abuse, for drug courts in eastern and western Washington;

(f) $302,551 to the
department for training and technical assistance of public defenders
representing clients with special needs;

(g) $88,000 to the
department to continue a substance abuse treatment in jails program, to test
the effect of treatment on future criminal behavior;

(h) $697,075 to the
department to continue domestic violence legal advocacy;

(i) $903,000 to the
department of social and health services, juvenile rehabilitation
administration, to continue youth violence prevention and intervention
projects;

(j) $60,000 to the
Washington association of sheriffs and police chiefs to complete the state and
local components of the national incident-based reporting system;

(k) $60,000 to the
department for community-based advocacy services to victims of violent crime,
other than sexual assault and domestic violence;

(l) $91,000 to the
department to continue the governor's council on substance abuse;

(m) $99,000 to the
department to continue evaluation of Byrne formula grant programs;

(n) $500,469 to the
office of financial management for criminal history records improvement; and

(o) $825,100 to the
department for required grant administration, monitoring, and reporting on
Byrne formula grant programs.

These amounts represent
the maximum Byrne grant expenditure authority for each program. No program may
expend Byrne grant funds in excess of the amounts provided in this subsection.
If moneys in excess of those appropriated in this subsection become available,
whether from prior or current fiscal year Byrne grant distributions, the
department shall hold these moneys in reserve and may not expend them without
specific appropriation. These moneys shall be carried forward and applied to
the pool of moneys available for appropriation for programs and projects in the
succeeding fiscal year. As part of its budget request for the succeeding year,
the department shall estimate and request authority to spend any funds
remaining in reserve as a result of this subsection.

(5) (($470,000))
(a) $10,512,393 of the general fund‑-federal appropriation is provided
solely for the drug control and system improvement formula grant program, to be
distributed in state fiscal year 2003 in accordance with the recommendations of
the Byrne grant advisory committee, provided that a maximum of $813,000 of the
appropriation may be spent by the department on grant administration,
monitoring, and reporting on Byrne formula grant programs.

(b) The $10,512,393
amount under (a) of this subsection represents the maximum Byrne grant
expenditure authority. If money in excess of this amount becomes available,
whether from prior or current fiscal year Byrne grant distributions, the
department shall hold these moneys in reserve and may not expend them without
specific appropriation. These moneys shall be carried forward and applied to
the pool of moneys available for appropriation for program and projects in the
succeeding fiscal year. As part of its budget request for the succeeding year,
the department shall estimate and request authority to spend any funds
remaining in reserve as a result of this subsection.

(6) $370,000 of
the general fund‑-state appropriation for fiscal year 2002 and (($470,000))
$50,000 of the general fund‑-state appropriation for fiscal year
2003 are provided solely for rural economic development activities including (($200,000))
$100,000 for the Washington manufacturing service, and $100,000 for business
retention and expansion.

(((6))) (7)
$1,250,000 of the general fund‑-state appropriation for fiscal year 2002
and $1,250,000 of the general fund‑-state appropriation for fiscal year
2003 are provided solely for grants to operate, repair, and staff shelters for
homeless families with children.

(((7))) (8)
$2,500,000 of the general fund‑-state appropriation for fiscal year 2002
and $2,500,000 of the general fund‑-state appropriation for fiscal year
2003 are provided solely for grants to operate transitional housing for
homeless families with children. The grants may also be used to make partial
payments for rental assistance.

(((8))) (9)
$1,250,000 of the general fund‑-state appropriation for fiscal year 2002
and $1,250,000 of the general fund‑-state appropriation for fiscal year
2003 are provided solely for consolidated emergency assistance to homeless
families with children.

(((9))) (10)
$205,000 of the general fund‑-state appropriation for fiscal year 2002 ((and
$205,000 of the general fund‑-state appropriation for fiscal year 2003
are)) is provided solely for grants to Washington Columbia river
gorge counties to implement their responsibilities under the national scenic
area management plan. Of this amount, (($390,000)) $195,000 is
provided for Skamania county and (($20,000)) $10,000 is provided
for Clark county.

(((10))) (11)
$698,000 of the general fund‑-state appropriation for fiscal year 2002,
$698,000 of the general fund‑-state appropriation for fiscal year 2003,
and $1,101,000 of the administrative contingency account appropriation are
provided solely for contracting with associate development organizations to
maintain existing programs.

(((11))) (12)
$600,000 of the public safety and education account appropriation is provided
solely for sexual assault prevention and treatment programs.

(((12))) (13)
$680,000 of the Washington housing trust account appropriation is provided
solely to conduct a pilot project designed to lower infrastructure costs for
residential development.

(((13))) (14)
$50,000 of the general fund‑-state appropriation for fiscal year 2002 and
$50,000 of the general fund‑-state appropriation for fiscal year 2003 are
provided to the department solely for providing technical assistance to
developers of housing for farmworkers.

(((14))) (15)
$370,000 of the general fund‑-state appropriation for fiscal year 2002,
$371,000 of the general fund‑-state appropriation for fiscal year 2003,
and $25,000 of the film and video promotion account appropriation are provided
solely for the film office to bring film and video production to Washington
state.

(((15))) (16)
$22,000 of the general fund‑‑state appropriation for fiscal year
2002 ((and $23,000 of the general fund‑‑state appropriation for
fiscal year 2003 are)) is provided solely as a matching grant to
support the Washington state senior games. State funding shall be matched with
at least an equal amount of private or local governmental funds.

(((16))) (17)
$500,000 of the general fund‑-state appropriation for fiscal year 2002
and $500,000 of the general fund‑-state appropriation for fiscal year
2003 are provided solely for grants to food banks and food distribution centers
to increase their ability to accept, store, and deliver perishable food.

(((17))) (18)
$230,000 of the general fund‑-state appropriation for fiscal year 2002,
$230,000 of the general fund‑-state appropriation for fiscal year 2003,
and the entire community economic development account appropriation are
provided solely for support of the developmental disabilities endowment
governing board and startup costs of the endowment program. Startup costs are
a loan from the state general fund and will be repaid from funds within the
program as determined by the governing board. The governing board may use
state appropriations to implement a sliding-scale fee waiver for families
earning below 150 percent of the state median family income. The director of
the department, or the director of the subsequent department of community
development, may implement fees to support the program as provided under RCW
43.330.152.

(((18))) (19)
$1,868,000 of the Washington housing trust account appropriation for fiscal
year 2003 is provided solely for emergency shelter assistance. If Substitute
House Bill No. 2060 (low-income housing) is not enacted by June 30, 2002, the
amount provided in this subsection shall lapse.

(20) $165,000 of the
building code council account appropriation is provided solely for the
council's activities. If neither House Bill No. 1363 or Senate Bill No. 5352
(increasing the building code council fee) is enacted by June 30, 2002, the
amount provided in this subsection shall lapse.

(21) $202,000 of the
mobile home park relocation account is provided solely for assisting mobile
home park residents who must relocate when a mobile home park is closed. If
neither House Bill No. 1630 or Senate Bill No. 5354 (modifying mobile home
relocation assistance) is enacted by June 30, 2002, the amount provided in this
subsection shall lapse.

(22) $880,000 of
the public safety and education account appropriation is provided solely for
community-based legal advocates to assist sexual assault victims with both
civil and criminal justice issues. If Senate Bill No. 5309 is not enacted by
June 30, 2001, the amount provided in this subsection shall lapse.

(((19))) (23)
$65,000 of the general fund‑-state appropriation for fiscal year 2002 and
$65,000 of the general fund‑-state appropriation for fiscal year 2003 are
provided solely for a contract with a food distribution program for communities
in the southwestern portion of the state and for workers impacted by timber and
salmon fishing closures and reductions. The department may not charge
administrative overhead or expenses to the funds provided in this subsection.

(((20))) (24)
$120,000 of the general fund‑‑state appropriation for fiscal year
2002 ((and $120,000 of the general fund‑‑state appropriation for
fiscal year 2003 are provided solely as one-time pass-through funding to
currently licensed overnight youth shelters)) and $120,000 from the
Washington housing trust account appropriation for fiscal year 2003 are
provided solely as one-time pass-through funding to currently licensed
overnight youth shelters. If Substitute House Bill no. 2060 (low-income housing)
is not enacted by June 30, 2002, the amount from the Washington housing trust
account provided in this subsection shall lapse.

(((21))) (25)
Repayments of outstanding loans granted under RCW 43.63A.600, the mortgage and
rental assistance program, shall be remitted to the department, including any
current revolving account balances. The department shall contract with a
lender or contract collection agent to act as a collection agent of the state.
The lender or contract collection agent shall collect payments on outstanding
loans, and deposit them into an interest-bearing account. The funds collected
shall be remitted to the department quarterly. Interest earned in the account
may be retained by the lender or contract collection agent, and shall be considered
a fee for processing payments on behalf of the state. Repayments of loans
granted under this chapter shall be made to the lender or contract collection
agent as long as the loan is outstanding, notwithstanding the repeal of the
chapter.

(((22))) (26)
$75,000 of the general fund‑-state appropriation for fiscal year 2002 ((and
$75,000 of the general fund‑-state appropriation for fiscal year 2003 are))
is provided solely for the community connections program in Walla Walla.

(((23))) (27)
$100,000 of the general fund‑-state appropriation for fiscal year 2002
and $100,000 of the general fund‑‑state appropriation for fiscal
year 2003 are provided to the office of community development solely for the
purposes of providing assistance to industrial workers who have been displaced
by energy cost-related industrial plant closures in rural counties. For
purposes of this subsection, "rural county" is as defined in RCW
82.14.370(5). The office of community development shall distribute the amount in
this subsection to community agencies that assist the displaced industrial
workers in meeting basic needs including, but not limited to, emergency medical
and dental services, family and mental health counseling, food, energy costs,
mortgage, and rental costs. The department shall not retain more than two
percent of the amount provided in this subsection for administrative costs.

(((24))) (28)
$91,500 of the general fund‑-state appropriation for fiscal year 2002 and
$91,500 of the general fund‑-state appropriation for fiscal year 2003 are
provided solely for services related to the foreign representative contract for
Japan.

(((25) $81,000 of
the general fund‑-state appropriation for fiscal year 2002 and $81,000 of
the general fund‑-state appropriation for fiscal year 2003 are provided
solely for business finance and loan programs.

(26))) (29) $150,000 of the general fund‑-state
appropriation for fiscal year 2002 is provided solely for the quick sites
initiative program.

(((27) $120,000 of
the general fund‑-state appropriation for fiscal year 2002 and $120,000
of the general fund‑-state appropriation for fiscal year 2003 are
provided solely for operating a business information hotline.

(28) $29,000 of the
general fund‑-state appropriation for fiscal year 2002 and $29,000 of
the general fund‑-state appropriation for fiscal year 2003 are provided
solely for travel expenses associated with the office of trade and economic
development's provision of outreach and technical assistance services to businesses
and local economic development associations.

(29))) (30) $100,000 of the general fund‑-state
appropriation for fiscal year 2002 and $100,000 of the general fund‑-state
appropriation for fiscal year 2003 are provided solely for information technology
enhancements designed to improve the delivery of agency services to customers.

(31) $104,000 of the
general fund‑-state appropriation for fiscal year 2003 is provided solely
for grants to public broadcasting television and radio stations.

(32) $1,000,000 of
the general fund‑-state appropriation for fiscal year 2003 is provided
solely for tourism marketing purposes.

Sec. 127. 2001 2nd sp.s. c 7 s 128
(uncodified) is amended to read as follows:

FOR THE ECONOMIC AND REVENUE
FORECAST COUNCIL

General Fund‑-State
Appropriation (FY 2002).... $ 512,000

General Fund‑-State
Appropriation (FY 2003).... $ ((514,000))

499,000

TOTAL
APPROPRIATION................. $ ((1,026,000))

1,011,000

Sec. 128. 2001 2nd sp.s. c 7 s 129
(uncodified) is amended to read as follows:

FOR THE OFFICE OF FINANCIAL
MANAGEMENT

General Fund‑-State
Appropriation (FY 2002).... $ 12,456,000

General Fund‑-State
Appropriation (FY 2003).... $ ((12,024,000))

11,923,000

General Fund‑-Federal
Appropriation............. $.................................. 23,657,000

Violence Reduction and Drug
Enforcement

Account‑‑State
Appropriation............... $ 229,000

State Auditing Services
Revolving

Account‑‑State
Appropriation........... ... $ 25,000

TOTAL
APPROPRIATION................. $ ((48,391,000))

48,290,000

(1) The
appropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and
limitations: The office of financial management shall review policies and
procedures regarding purchasing of information technology upgrades by state
agencies. Information technology upgrades include replacement workstations,
network equipment, operating systems and application software. The review
shall document existing policies and procedures, and shall compare alternative
upgrade policies that reduce the overall cost to state government for
maintaining adequate information technology to meet the existing business needs
of state agencies. Findings and recommendations from this review shall be
reported to appropriate committees of the legislature by December 1, 2001.

(2) $500,000 of the
general fund‑-state appropriation for fiscal year 2003 is provided solely
to implement House Bill No. 2563 (creating the governor's performance audit
standards and scorecard commission.) If House Bill No. 2563 is not enacted by
June 30, 2002, the amount provided in this subsection shall lapse.

(3) The office of
financial management shall reduce financial system services rates so that
client state agencies realize a total savings of $339,000 in fiscal year 2003.

Sec. 129. 2001 2nd sp.s. c 7 s 130
(uncodified) is amended to read as follows:

FOR THE OFFICE OF ADMINISTRATIVE
HEARINGS

Administrative Hearings
Revolving Account‑-State

Appropriation.............................. $ ((21,938,000))

22,394,000

Sec. 130. 2001 2nd sp.s. c 7 s 131
(uncodified) is amended to read as follows:

FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF PERSONNEL

Department of Personnel
Service Account‑-State

Appropriation.............................. $ ((17,297,000))

17,037,000

Higher Education Personnel
Services Account‑-State

Appropriation.............................. $ 1,636,000

TOTAL
APPROPRIATION................. $ ((18,933,000))

18,673,000

The appropriations in
this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations: The
department of personnel may charge agencies, through the data processing
revolving account, up to $561,000 in fiscal year 2002 to study the
development of a new personnel and payroll system. Funding to cover these
expenses shall be realized from agency FICA savings associated with the pretax
benefits contributions plans. Funding is subject to section 902 of this act.

Sec. 131. 2001 2nd sp.s. c 7 s 132
(uncodified) is amended to read as follows:

FOR THE WASHINGTON STATE LOTTERY

Lottery Administrative
Account‑-State

Appropriation.............................. $ ((22,130,000))

21,795,000

NEW SECTION. Sec.
132. A new section is added
to 2001 2nd sp.s. c 7 (uncodified) to read as follows:

STATE GAMBLING
COMMISSION

The state gambling
commission is directed to reduce its fiscal year 2003 expenditures from the
gambling revolving account by the amount of $450,000.

Sec. 133. 2001 2nd sp.s. c 7 s 133
(uncodified) is amended to read as follows:

FOR THE COMMISSION ON HISPANIC
AFFAIRS

General Fund‑-State
Appropriation (FY 2002).... $ 226,000

General Fund‑-State
Appropriation (FY 2003).... $ ((234,000))

210,000

TOTAL
APPROPRIATION................. $ ((460,000))

436,000

Sec. 134. 2001 2nd sp.s. c 7 s 134
(uncodified) is amended to read as follows:

FOR THE COMMISSION ON AFRICAN-AMERICAN
AFFAIRS

General Fund‑-State
Appropriation (FY 2002).... $ 211,000

General Fund‑-State
Appropriation (FY 2003).... $ ((209,000))

207,000

TOTAL
APPROPRIATION................. $ ((420,000))

418,000

Sec. 135. 2001 2nd sp.s. c 7 s 135
(uncodified) is amended to read as follows:

FOR THE PERSONNEL APPEALS BOARD

Department of Personnel
Service Account‑-State

Appropriation.............................. $ ((1,679,000))

1,705,000

Sec. 136. 2001 2nd sp.s. c 7 s 136
(uncodified) is amended to read as follows:

FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF
RETIREMENT SYSTEMS‑-OPERATIONS

Dependent Care
Administrative Account‑-State

Appropriation.............................. $ 378,000

Department of Retirement
Systems Expense Account‑-

State Appropriation........................ $ ((49,562,000))

49,050,000

TOTAL
APPROPRIATION................. $ ((49,940,000))

49,428,000

The appropriations in
this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations:

(1) $1,000,000 of the
department of retirement systems expense account appropriation is provided
solely for support of the information systems project known as the electronic
document image management system.

(2) $120,000 of the
department of retirement systems expense account appropriation is provided
solely for locating inactive members entitled to retirement benefits.

(3) $117,000 of the
department of retirement systems expense account appropriation is provided
solely for modifications to the retirement information systems to accommodate
tracking of postretirement employment on an hourly basis.

(4) $440,000 of the
department of retirement systems expense account is provided solely for the
implementation of Engrossed Senate Bill No. 5143 (Washington state patrol
retirement systems plan 2).

(5) $6,420,000 of the
department of retirement systems expense account is provided solely for the
implementation of public employees' retirement system plan 3 (chapter 247, Laws
of 2000).

(6) (($101,000 of
the department of retirement systems expense account‑-state appropriation
is provided solely to implement Senate Bill No. 5144 (LEOFF survivor benefit).
If the bill is not enacted by July 31, 2001, the amount provided in this
subsection shall lapse.

(7) $744,000 of the
department of retirement systems expense account‑-state appropriation is
provided solely to implement Second Engrossed Substitute Senate Bill No. 6166
(LEOFF restructuring). If the bill is not enacted by July 31, 2001, the amount
provided in this subsection shall lapse.)) $96,000 of the department of retirement systems expense account
appropriation is provided solely for the implementation of Senate Bill No. 6376
or House Bill No. 2389 (PERS plan 3 transfer payment). If neither bill is
enacted by June 30, 2002, the amount provided in this subsection shall lapse.

(7) $9,000 of the
department of retirement systems expense account appropriation is provided solely
for the implementation of Senate Bill No. 6377 or House Bill No. 2390 (TRS plan
1 extended school year). If neither bill is enacted by June 30, 2002, the
amount provided in this subsection shall lapse.

(8) $12,000 of the
department of retirement systems expense account appropriation is provided
solely for the implementation of Senate Bill No. 6378 (LEOFF plan 2 part-time
leave of absence). If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2002, the amount
provided in this subsection shall lapse.

(9) $122,000 of the
department of retirement systems expense account appropriation is provided
solely for the implementation of Senate Bill No. 6379 or House Bill No. 2392
(transferring service credit to WSPRS). If neither bill is enacted by June 30,
2002, the amount provided in this subsection shall lapse.

(10) $627,000 of the
department of retirement systems expense account appropriation is provided
solely for the implementation of Engrossed Senate Bill No. 6380 or House Bill
No. 2393 (survivor benefits). If neither bill is enacted by June 30, 2002, the
amount provided in this subsection shall lapse.

(11) $53,000 of the
department of retirement systems expense account appropriation is provided
solely for the implementation of Senate Bill No. 6381 or House Bill No. 2394
(PERS plan 1 terminated vested). If neither bill is enacted by June 30, 2002,
the amount provided in this subsection shall lapse.

(12) The department
of retirement systems may, in consultation with private entities and the joint
committee on pension policy as appropriate, investigate providing the citizens
of Washington alternatives for retirement investments. The department shall
consult with the senate and house of representatives fiscal committees by
December 2002 regarding any recommendations for implementation of a pilot
program.

Sec. 137. 2001 2nd sp.s. c 7 s 137
(uncodified) is amended to read as follows:

FOR THE STATE INVESTMENT BOARD

State Investment Board
Expense Account‑-State

Appropriation.............................. $ ((12,876,000))

13,461,000

Sec. 138. 2001 2nd sp.s. c 7 s 138
(uncodified) is amended to read as follows:

FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF REVENUE

General Fund‑-State
Appropriation (FY 2002).... $ 72,820,000

General Fund‑-State
Appropriation (FY 2003).... $ ((72,387,000))

77,948,000

Timber Tax Distribution
Account‑-State

Appropriation.............................. $ 5,131,000

Waste
Education/Recycling/Litter Control‑-State

Appropriation.............................. $ 101,000

State Toxics Control
Account‑-State

Appropriation.............................. $ 67,000

Oil Spill Administration
Account‑-State

Appropriation.............................. $ 14,000

Multimodal
Transportation Account‑-State

Appropriation.............................. $ 115,000

TOTAL
APPROPRIATION................. $ ((150,520,000))

156,196,000

The appropriations in
this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations:

$269,000 of the general
fund‑‑state appropriation for fiscal year 2002 and $49,000 of the
general fund‑‑state appropriation for fiscal year 2003 are provided
solely to establish and provide staff support to a committee on taxation to
study the elasticity, equity, and adequacy of the state's tax system.

(1) The committee shall
consist of eleven members. The department shall appoint six academic scholars
from the fields of economics, taxation, business administration, public
administration, public policy, and other relevant disciplines as determined by
the department, after consulting with the majority and minority leaders in the
senate, the co-speakers in the house of representatives, the chair of the ways
and means committee in the senate, and the co-chairs of the finance committee
in the house of representatives. The governor and the chairs of the majority
and minority caucuses in each house of the legislature shall each appoint one
member to the committee. These appointments may be legislative members. The
members of the committee shall either elect a voting chair from among their
membership or a nonvoting chair who is not a member of the committee. Members
of the committee shall serve without compensation but shall be reimbursed for
travel expenses under RCW 43.03.050 and 43.03.060.

(2) The purpose of the
study is to determine how well the current tax system functions and how it
might be changed to better serve the citizens of the state in the twenty-first
century. In reviewing options for changes to the tax system, the committee
shall develop multiple alternatives to the existing tax system. To the extent
possible, the alternatives shall be designed to increase the harmony between
the tax system of this state and the surrounding states, encourage commerce and
business creation, and encourage home ownership. In developing alternatives,
the committee shall examine and consider the effects of tax incentives,
including exemptions, deferrals, and credits. The alternatives shall range
from incremental improvements in the current tax structure to complete
replacement of the tax structure. In conducting the study, the committee shall
examine the tax structures of other states and review previous studies
regarding tax reform in this state. In developing alternatives, the committee
shall be guided by administrative simplicity, economic neutrality, fairness,
stability, and transparency. Most of the alternatives presented by the
committee to the legislature shall be revenue neutral and contain no income
tax.

(3) The department
shall create an advisory group to include, but not be limited to,
representatives of business, state agencies, local governments, labor,
taxpayers, and other advocacy groups. The group shall provide advice and
assistance to the committee.

(4) The committee shall
present a final report of its findings and alternatives to the ways and means
committee in the senate and the finance committee in the house of
representatives by November 30, 2002.

Sec. 139. 2001 2nd sp.s. c 7 s 139
(uncodified) is amended to read as follows:

FOR THE BOARD OF TAX APPEALS

General Fund‑-State
Appropriation (FY 2002).... $ 1,193,000

General Fund‑-State
Appropriation (FY 2003).... $ ((1,038,000))

1,007,000

TOTAL APPROPRIATION................. $ ((2,231,000))

2,200,000

Sec. 140. 2001 2nd sp.s. c 7 s 142
(uncodified) is amended to read as follows:

FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF GENERAL
ADMINISTRATION

General Fund‑-State
Appropriation (FY 2002).... $ 549,000

General Fund‑-State
Appropriation (FY 2003).... $ ((630,000))

611,000

General Fund‑-Federal
Appropriation............. $.................................. 1,930,000

General Fund‑-Private/Local
Appropriation...... $ ((444,000))

223,000

State Capitol Vehicle
Parking Account‑-

State Appropriation........................ $ 154,000

General Administration
Services Account‑-State

Appropriation.............................. $ ((41,419,000))

39,546,000

TOTAL
APPROPRIATION................. $ ((45,126,000))

43,013,000

The appropriations in
this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations:

(1) The department
shall conduct a review of the ultimate purchasing system to evaluate the
following: (a) The degree to which program objectives and assumptions were
achieved; (b) the degree to which planned schedule of phases, tasks, and
activities were accomplished; (c) an assessment of estimated and actual costs
of each phase; (d) an assessment of project cost recovery/cost avoidance,
return on investment, and measurable outcomes as each relate to the agency's
business functions and other agencies' business functions; and (e) the degree
to which integration with the agency and state information technology
infrastructure was achieved. The department will receive written input from
participating pilot agencies that describes measurable organizational benefits
and cost avoidance opportunities derived from use of the ultimate purchasing
system. The performance review shall be submitted to the office of financial management
and the appropriate legislative fiscal committees by July 1, 2002.

(2) $60,000 of the
general administration services account appropriation is provided solely for
costs associated with the development of the information technology
architecture to link the risk management information system and the tort
division's case management system, and the reconciliation of defense cost
reimbursement information.

(3) The department
shall reduce rates for motor pool, consolidated mail, and other services that
state agencies purchase so that client state agencies realize a total savings
of $1,302,000 in fiscal year 2003.

Sec. 141. 2001 2nd sp.s. c 7 s 143
(uncodified) is amended to read as follows:

FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF
INFORMATION SERVICES

Data Processing Revolving
Account‑-State

Appropriation.............................. $ ((3,706,000))

3,610,000

The appropriation in
this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations:

(1) Fifteen independent
private, nonprofit colleges, located in Washington state, have requested
connection to the K-20 educational telecommunications network. These K-20
connections shall be provided to the private schools on a full cost
reimbursement basis, net of the value of services and information provided by
the private institutions, based on criteria approved by the K-20 board.

(2) Some private K-12
schools have requested limited "pilot connections" to the K-20
network to test the technical and economic feasibility of one or more
connection models. These K-20 connections shall be provided to the private
K-12 schools on a full cost reimbursement basis, net of the value of services
and information provided by the private K-12 schools based on criteria approved
by the K-20 board.

(3) In the 2001-03
biennium, the department shall incorporate statewide elements for a common
technology infrastructure into the state strategic information technology plan
that state agencies shall then use in establishing individual agency business
applications.

(4) The department
shall implement the $10,800,000 service rate reduction it proposed on August
14, 2000.

(5) The department
shall reduce rates for data processing and other computer services so that
client state agencies realize a total savings of $2,660,000 in fiscal year
2003.

Sec. 142. 2001 2nd sp.s. c 7 s 144
(uncodified) is amended to read as follows:

FOR THE INSURANCE COMMISSIONER

General Fund‑-Federal
Appropriation............. $ 622,000

Insurance Commissioners
Regulatory Account‑-State

Appropriation.............................. $ ((29,053,000))

29,207,000

TOTAL
APPROPRIATION................. $ ((29,675,000))

29,829,000

The appropriations in
this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations: $693,000
of the insurance commissioner's regulatory account appropriation is provided
solely for moving and renovation costs associated with the colocation of the agency's
Olympia-area facilities. Expenditures from this amount shall be subject to the
approval of the department of general administration.

Sec. 143. 2001 2nd sp.s. c 7 s 148
(uncodified) is amended to read as follows:

FOR THE LIQUOR CONTROL BOARD

General Fund‑-State
Appropriation (FY 2002).... $ 1,483,000

General Fund‑-State
Appropriation (FY 2003).... $ ((1,484,000))

1,439,000

General Fund‑-Federal
Appropriation............. $ 99,000

Liquor Control Board Construction
and Maintenance

Account‑-State
Appropriation............... $ ((8,114,000))

9,121,000

Liquor Revolving Account‑-State

Appropriation.............................. $ ((142,148,000))

125,927,000

TOTAL
APPROPRIATION................. $ ((153,229,000))

138,069,000

The appropriations in
this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations:

(1) $1,573,000 of the
liquor revolving account appropriation is provided solely for the agency
information technology upgrade. This amount provided in this subsection is
conditioned upon satisfying the requirements of section 902 of this act.

(2) $4,803,000 of the
liquor revolving account appropriation is provided solely for the costs
associated with the development and implementation of a merchandising business
system. Expenditures of any funds for this system are conditioned upon the
approval of the merchandising business system's feasibility study by the
information services board. The amount provided in this subsection is also
conditioned upon satisfying the requirements of section 902 of this act.

Sec. 144. 2001 2nd sp.s. c 7 s 149
(uncodified) is amended to read as follows:

FOR THE UTILITIES AND
TRANSPORTATION COMMISSION

Public Service Revolving
Account‑-State

Appropriation.............................. $ ((27,108,000))

27,102,000

Pipeline Safety Account‑-State

Appropriation.............................. $ 3,305,000

Pipeline Safety Account‑-Federal

Appropriation.............................. $ 822,000

TOTAL
APPROPRIATION................. $ ((31,235,000))

31,229,000

The appropriations in
this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations:

(1) $3,011,000 of the
pipeline safety account‑-state appropriation and $822,000 of the pipeline
safety account‑-federal appropriation are provided solely for the
implementation of Substitute Senate Bill No. 5182 (pipeline safety). If the
bill is not enacted by June 30, 2001, the amount provided in this subsection
shall lapse.

(2) $294,000 of the
pipeline safety account‑-state appropriation is provided solely for an
interagency agreement with the joint legislative audit and review committee for
a report on hazardous liquid and gas pipeline safety programs. The committee
shall review staff use, inspection activity, fee methodology, and costs of the
hazardous liquid and gas pipeline safety programs and report to the appropriate
legislative committees by July 1, 2003. The report shall include a comparison
of interstate and intrastate programs, including but not limited to the number
and complexity of regular and specialized inspections, mapping requirements for
each program, and allocation of administrative costs to each program. If
Substitute Senate Bill No. 5182 (pipeline safety) is not enacted by June 30,
2001, the amount provided in this section shall lapse.

(3) $50,000 of the
public service revolving account‑-state appropriation for fiscal year
2002 and $350,000 of the public service revolving account‑-state
appropriation for fiscal year 2003 are provided solely for implementation of
Substitute House Bill No. 2845 (utilities and transportation commission). If
the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2002, the amount provided in this
subsection shall lapse.

Sec. 145. 2001 2nd sp.s. c 7 s 150
(uncodified) is amended to read as follows:

FOR THE BOARD FOR VOLUNTEER
FIREFIGHTERS

Volunteer Firefighters'
Relief and Pension

Administrative Account‑-State

Appropriation.............................. $ 569,000

Sec. 146. 2001 2nd sp.s. c 7 s 151
(uncodified) is amended to read as follows:

FOR THE MILITARY DEPARTMENT

General Fund‑-State
Appropriation (FY 2002).... $ 9,165,000

General Fund‑-State
Appropriation (FY 2003).... $ ((8,979,000))

8,816,000

General Fund‑-Federal
Appropriation............. $.................................. 22,509,000

General Fund‑-Private/Local
Appropriation...... $ 234,000

Enhanced 911 Account‑-State
Appropriation...... $ ((16,544,000))

20,269,000

Disaster Response Account‑-State
Appropriation. $ ((582,000))

1,906,000

Disaster Response Account‑-Federal
Appropriation $ ((3,392,000))

6,510,000

Worker and Community Right
to Know Fund‑‑State

Appropriation.............................. $ 283,000

Nisqually Earthquake
Account‑‑State

Appropriation.............................. $ ((37,884,000))

29,027,000

Nisqually Earthquake
Account‑‑Federal

Appropriation.............................. $ ((157,795,000))

49,641,000

TOTAL
APPROPRIATION................. $ ((257,367,000))

148,360,000

The appropriations in
this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations:

(1) (($582,000))
$1,906,000 of the disaster response account‑-state appropriation
is provided solely for the state share of response and recovery costs
associated with federal emergency management agency (FEMA) disasters approved
in the 1999-01 biennium budget. The military department may, upon approval of
the director of financial management, use portions of the disaster response
account‑-state appropriation to offset costs of new disasters occurring
before June 30, 2003. The military department shall submit a report quarterly
to the office of financial management and the legislative fiscal committees
detailing disaster costs, including: (a) Estimates of total costs; (b)
incremental changes from the previous estimate; (c) actual expenditures; (d)
estimates of total remaining costs to be paid; and (d) estimates of future
payments by biennium. This information shall be displayed by individual
disaster, by fund, and by type of assistance. The military department shall
also submit a report quarterly to the office of financial management and the
legislative fiscal committees detailing information on the disaster response
account, including: (a) The amount and type of deposits into the account; (b)
the current available fund balance as of the reporting date; and (c) the projected
fund balance at the end of the 2001-03 biennium based on current revenue and
expenditure patterns.

(2) $100,000 of the
general fund‑-state fiscal year 2002 appropriation and $100,000 of the
general fund‑-state fiscal year 2003 appropriation are provided solely
for implementation of the conditional scholarship program pursuant to chapter
28B.103 RCW.

(3) $60,000 of the
general fund‑-state appropriation for fiscal year 2002 and $60,000 of the
general fund‑-state appropriation for fiscal year 2003 are provided
solely for the implementation of Senate Bill No. 5256 (emergency management
compact). If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2001, the amounts provided in
this subsection shall lapse.

(4) $35,000 of the
general fund‑‑state fiscal year 2002 appropriation and $35,000 of
the general fund‑‑state fiscal year 2003 appropriation are provided
solely for the north county emergency medical service.

(5) (($1,374,000))
$2,145,000 of the Nisqually earthquake account‑-state appropriation
and (($3,861,000)) $4,174,000 of the Nisqually earthquake account‑-federal
appropriation are provided solely for the military department's costs
associated with coordinating the state's response to the February 28, 2001,
earthquake.

(6) (($1,347,000))
$678,000 of the Nisqually earthquake account‑-state appropriation
and (($5,359,000)) $3,420,000 of the Nisqually earthquake account‑-federal
appropriation are provided solely for mitigation costs associated with the
earthquake for state and local agencies. Of the amount from the Nisqually
earthquake account‑-state appropriation, (($898,000)) $217,000
is provided for the state matching share for state agencies and (($449,000))
$462,000 is provided for one-half of the local matching share for local
entities. The amount provided for the local matching share constitutes a
revenue distribution for purposes of RCW 43.135.060(1).

(7) (($35,163,000))
$8,970,000 of the Nisqually earthquake account‑-state
appropriation and (($148,575,000)) $42,047,000 of the Nisqually
earthquake account‑-federal appropriation are provided solely for public
assistance costs associated with the earthquake for state and local agencies.
Of the amount from the Nisqually earthquake account‑-state appropriation,
(($20,801,000)) $3,924,000 is provided for the state matching
share for state agencies and (($14,362,000)) $5,046,000 is
provided for one-half of the local matching share for local entities. The
amount provided for the local matching share constitutes a revenue distribution
for purposes of RCW 43.135.060(1). ((Upon approval of the director of
financial management, the military department may use portions of the Nisqually
earthquake account‑-state appropriations to cover other response and
recovery costs associated with the Nisqually earthquake that are not eligible
for federal emergency management agency reimbursement. The military department
is to submit a quarterly report detailing the costs authorized under this
subsection to the office of financial management and the legislative fiscal
committees.))

(8) $17,234,000 of
the Nisqually earthquake account‑-state appropriation is provided solely
to cover other response and recovery costs associated with the Nisqually
earthquake that are not eligible for federal emergency management agency
reimbursement. Prior to expending funds provided in the subsection, the
military department shall obtain prior approval of the director of financial
management. Prior to approving any single project of over $1,000,000, the
office of financial management shall notify the fiscal committees of the
legislature. The military department is to submit a quarterly report detailing
the costs authorized under this subsection to the office of financial
management and the legislative fiscal committees.

(9) $106,000 of the
general fund‑-state appropriation for fiscal year 2003 is provided solely
for implementation of Substitute House Bill No. 2853
(terrorism/infrastructure). If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2002, the
amount provided in this subsection shall lapse.

(10) $2,818,000 of
the enhanced 911 account‑-state appropriation is provided solely for the
implementation of House Bill No. 2595 or Engrossed Second Substitute Senate
Bill No. 6034 (enhanced 911 excise tax). If neither bill is enacted by June
30, 2002, the amount provided in this subsection shall lapse.

Sec. 147. 2001 2nd sp.s. c 7 s 152
(uncodified) is amended to read as follows:

FOR THE PUBLIC EMPLOYMENT
RELATIONS COMMISSION

General Fund‑-State
Appropriation (FY 2002).... $ ((2,154,000))

2,225,000

General Fund‑-State
Appropriation (FY 2003).... $ ((2,164,000))

2,292,000

TOTAL
APPROPRIATION................. $ ((4,318,000))

4,517,000

Sec. 148. 2001 2nd sp.s. c 7 s 153
(uncodified) is amended to read as follows:

FOR THE GROWTH PLANNING HEARINGS
BOARD

General Fund‑-State
Appropriation (FY 2002).... $ 1,497,000

General Fund‑-State
Appropriation (FY 2003).... $ ((1,506,000))

1,461,000

TOTAL
APPROPRIATION................. $ ((3,003,000))

2,958,000

(End
of part)

PART
II

HUMAN SERVICES

Sec. 201. 2001 2nd sp.s. c 7 s 201
(uncodified) is amended to read as follows:

FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF SOCIAL AND
HEALTH SERVICES. (1)
Appropriations made in this act to the department of social and health services
shall initially be allotted as required by this act. Subsequent allotment
modifications shall not include transfers of moneys between sections of this
act except as expressly provided in this act, nor shall allotment modifications
permit moneys that are provided solely for a specified purpose to be used for
other than that purpose, except as expressly provided in subsection (3) of this
section.

(2) The department of
social and health services shall not initiate any services that will require
expenditure of state general fund moneys unless expressly authorized in this
act or other law. The department may seek, receive, and spend, under RCW
43.79.260 through 43.79.282, federal moneys not anticipated in this act as long
as the federal funding does not require expenditure of state moneys for the
program in excess of amounts anticipated in this act. If the department
receives unanticipated unrestricted federal moneys, those moneys shall be spent
for services authorized in this act or in any other legislation providing
appropriation authority, and an equal amount of appropriated state general fund
moneys shall lapse. Upon the lapsing of any moneys under this subsection, the
office of financial management shall notify the legislative fiscal committees.
As used in this subsection, "unrestricted federal moneys" includes
block grants and other funds that federal law does not require to be spent on
specifically defined projects or matched on a formula basis by state funds.

(3)(a) The
appropriations to the department of social and health services in this act
shall be expended for the programs and in the amounts specified in this act. However,
after May 1, 2002, unless specifically prohibited by this act, the department
may transfer general fund‑-state appropriations for fiscal year 2002
among programs after approval by the director of financial management.
However, the department shall not transfer state moneys that are provided
solely for a specified purpose except as expressly provided in (b) of this
subsection (3).

(b) To the extent
that transfers under (a) of this subsection (3) are insufficient to fund actual
expenditures in excess of fiscal year 2002 caseload forecasts and utilization
assumptions in the medical assistance, long-term care, foster care, adoption
support, and child support programs, the department may transfer state moneys
that are provided solely for a specified purpose after approval by the director
of financial management.

(c) The director of
financial management shall notify the appropriate fiscal committees of the
senate and house of representatives in writing prior to approving any allotment
modifications or transfers under this subsection.

(4) In the event the
department receives additional unrestricted federal funds or achieves savings
in excess of that anticipated in this act, the department shall use up to
$5,000,000 of such funds to initiate a pilot project providing integrated
support services to homeless individuals needing mental health services, alcohol
or substance abuse treatment, medical care, or who demonstrate community safety
concerns. Before such a pilot project is initiated, the department shall
notify the fiscal committees of the legislature of the plans for such a pilot
project including the source of funds to be used.

Sec. 202. 2001 2nd sp.s. c 7 s 202
(uncodified) is amended to read as follows:

FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF
SOCIAL AND HEALTH SERVICES‑-CHILDREN AND FAMILY
SERVICES PROGRAM

General Fund‑-State
Appropriation (FY 2002).... $ ((225,789,000))

225,104,000

General Fund‑-State
Appropriation (FY 2003).... $ ((239,013,000))

224,947,000

General Fund‑-Federal
Appropriation............. $.................................. ((372,408,000))

369,490,000

General Fund‑-Private/Local
Appropriation...... $ 400,000

Public Safety and Education
Account‑-

State Appropriation........................ $ ((987,000))

967,000

Violence Reduction and Drug
Enforcement Account‑-

State Appropriation........................ $ ((5,702,000))

3,598,000

TOTAL
APPROPRIATION................. $ ((844,299,000))

824,506,000

The appropriations in
this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations:

(1) $2,237,000 of the
fiscal year 2002 general fund‑-state appropriation, (($2,288,000))
$2,274,000 of the fiscal year 2003 general fund‑-state
appropriation, and (($1,590,000)) $1,585,000 of the general fund‑-federal
appropriation are provided solely for the category of services titled
"intensive family preservation services."

(2) $685,000 of the
general fund‑-state fiscal year 2002 appropriation and $701,000 of the
general fund‑-state fiscal year 2003 appropriation are provided to
contract for the operation of one pediatric interim care facility. The
facility shall provide residential care for up to thirteen children through two
years of age. Seventy-five percent of the children served by the facility must
be in need of special care as a result of substance abuse by their mothers.
The facility shall also provide on-site training to biological, adoptive, or
foster parents. The facility shall provide at least three months of
consultation and support to parents accepting placement of children from the
facility. The facility may recruit new and current foster and adoptive parents
for infants served by the facility. The department shall not require case
management as a condition of the contract.

(3) $524,000 of the
general fund‑-state fiscal year 2002 appropriation ((and $536,000)),
$375,000 of the general fund‑-state fiscal year 2003 appropriation,
and $161,000 of the general fund‑‑federal appropriation are
provided for up to three nonfacility-based programs for the training,
consultation, support, and recruitment of biological, foster, and adoptive
parents of children through age three in need of special care as a result of
substance abuse by their mothers, except that each program may serve up to
three medically fragile nonsubstance-abuse-affected children. In selecting
nonfacility-based programs, preference shall be given to programs whose federal
or private funding sources have expired or that have successfully performed
under the existing pediatric interim care program.

(4) (($1,260,000 of
the fiscal year 2002 general fund‑-state appropriation, $1,248,000 of the
fiscal year 2003 general fund‑-state appropriation, and $4,196,000 of the
violence reduction and drug enforcement account appropriation are provided
solely for the family policy council and community public health and safety
networks. The funding level for the family policy council and community public
health and safety networks represents a 25 percent reduction below the funding
level for the 1999-2001 biennium. Funding levels shall be reduced 25 percent
for both the family policy council and network grants. Reductions to network
grants shall be allocated so as to maintain current funding levels, to the
greatest extent possible, for projects with the strongest evidence of positive
outcomes and for networks with substantial compliance with contracts for
network grants.

(5))) $2,215,000 of the fiscal year 2002 general
fund‑-state appropriation, $4,394,000 of the fiscal year 2003 general
fund‑-state appropriation, and $5,604,000 of the general fund‑-federal
appropriation are provided solely for reducing the average caseload level per
case-carrying social worker. Average caseload reductions are intended to
increase the amount of time social workers spend in direct contact with the
children, families, and foster parents involved with their open cases. The
department shall use some of the funds provided in several local offices to
increase staff that support case-carrying social workers in ways that will
allow social workers to increase direct contact time with children, families,
and foster parents. To achieve the goal of reaching an average caseload ratio
of 1:24 by the end of fiscal year 2003, the department shall develop a plan for
redeploying 30 FTEs to case-carrying social worker and support positions from
other areas in the children and family services budget. The FTE redeployment
plan shall be submitted to the fiscal committees of the legislature by December
1, 2001.

(((6))) (5)
$1,000,000 of the fiscal year 2002 general fund‑-state appropriation and
$1,000,000 of the fiscal year 2003 general fund‑-state appropriation are
provided solely for increasing foster parent respite care services that improve
the retention of foster parents and increase the stability of foster
placements. The department shall report quarterly to the appropriate
committees of the legislature progress against appropriate baseline measures
for foster parent retention and stability of foster placements.

(((7))) (6)
$1,050,000 of the general fund‑-federal appropriation is provided solely
for increasing kinship care placements for children who otherwise would likely
be placed in foster care. These funds shall be used for extraordinary costs
incurred by relatives at the time of placement, or for extraordinary costs
incurred by relatives after placement if such costs would likely cause a
disruption in the kinship care placement. $50,000 of the funds provided shall
be contracted to the Washington institute for public policy to conduct a study
of kinship care placements. The study shall examine the prevalence and needs
of families who are raising related children and shall compare services and
policies of Washington state with other states that have a higher rate of
kinship care placements in lieu of foster care placements. The study shall
identify possible changes in services and policies that are likely to increase
appropriate kinship care placements.

(((8))) (7)
$3,386,000 of the fiscal year 2002 general fund‑-state appropriation, (($7,671,000))
$6,708,000 of the fiscal year 2003 general fund‑-state
appropriation, and (($20,819,000)) $20,142,000 of the general
fund‑-federal appropriation are provided solely for increases in the cost
per case for foster care and adoption support. $16,000,000 of the general fund‑-federal
amount shall remain unallotted until the office of financial management
approves a plan submitted by the department to achieve a higher rate of federal
earnings in the foster care program. That plan shall also be submitted to the
fiscal committees of the legislature and shall indicate projected federal
revenue compared to actual fiscal year 2001 levels. Within the amounts
provided for foster care, the department shall increase the basic rate for
foster care to an average of $420 per month on July 1, 2001((, and to an
average of $440 per month on July 1, 2002)). The department shall use the
remaining funds provided in this subsection to pay for increases in the cost
per case for foster care and adoption support. The department shall seek to
control rate increases and reimbursement decisions for foster care and adoption
support cases such that the cost per case for family foster care, group care,
receiving homes, and adoption support does not exceed the amount assumed in the
projected caseload expenditures plus the amounts provided in this subsection.

(((9))) (8)
$1,767,000 of the general fund‑-state appropriation for fiscal year 2002,
(($2,461,000)) $1,767,000 of the general fund‑-state
appropriation for fiscal year 2003, and (($1,485,000)) $1,241,000
of the general fund‑-federal appropriation are provided solely for rate
and capacity increases for child placing agencies. Child placing agencies
shall increase their capacity by 15 percent in fiscal year 2002 ((and 30
percent in fiscal year 2003)).

(((10) The
department shall provide secure crisis residential facilities across the state
in a manner that: (a) Retains geographic provision of these services; and (b)
retains beds in high use areas.

(11))) (9) $125,000 of the general fund‑‑state
appropriation for fiscal year 2002 and $125,000 of the general fund‑‑state
appropriation for fiscal year 2003 are provided solely for a foster parent
retention program. This program is directed at foster parents caring for
children who act out sexually, as described in House Bill No. 1525 (foster
parent retention program).

(10) Sufficient
funds are provided in this section to implement House Bill No. 2459 (children's
programs/services).

Sec. 203. 2001 2nd sp.s. c 7 s 203
(uncodified) is amended to read as follows:

FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF
SOCIAL AND HEALTH SERVICES‑-JUVENILE REHABILITATION
PROGRAM

(1) COMMUNITY SERVICES

General Fund‑-State
Appropriation (FY 2002).... $ ((36,625,000))

34,767,000

General Fund‑-State
Appropriation (FY 2003).... $ ((38,125,000))

30,243,000

General Fund‑-Federal
Appropriation............. $.................................. ((14,609,000))

13,193,000

General Fund‑-Private/Local
Appropriation...... $ ((380,000))

375,000

Juvenile Accountability
Incentive

Account‑-Federal Appropriation.............. $ 9,361,000

Public Safety and Education

Account‑-State
Appropriation............... $ ((6,196,000))

5,023,000

Violence Reduction and Drug
Enforcement Account‑-

State Appropriation........................ $ ((21,972,000))

21,903,000

TOTAL
APPROPRIATION.............. ... $ ((127,268,000))

114,865,000

The appropriations in
this subsection are subject to the following conditions and limitations:

(a) $686,000 of the
violence reduction and drug enforcement account appropriation is provided
solely for deposit in the county criminal justice assistance account for costs
to the criminal justice system associated with the implementation of chapter
338, Laws of 1997 (juvenile code revisions). The amounts provided in this
subsection are intended to provide funding for county adult court costs
associated with the implementation of chapter 338, Laws of 1997 and shall be
distributed in accordance with RCW 82.14.310.

(b) $5,980,000 of the
violence reduction and drug enforcement account appropriation is provided
solely for the implementation of chapter 338, Laws of 1997 (juvenile code
revisions). The amounts provided in this subsection are intended to provide funding
for county impacts associated with the implementation of chapter 338, Laws of
1997 and shall be distributed to counties as prescribed in the current
consolidated juvenile services (CJS) formula.

(c) $1,161,000 of the
general fund‑-state appropriation for fiscal year 2002, $1,162,000 of the
general fund‑-state appropriation for fiscal year 2003, and $5,190,000 of
the violence reduction and drug enforcement account appropriation are provided
solely to implement community juvenile accountability grants pursuant to
chapter 338, Laws of 1997 (juvenile code revisions). Funds provided in this
subsection may be used solely for community juvenile accountability grants,
administration of the grants, and evaluations of programs funded by the grants.

(d) $2,515,000 of the
violence reduction and drug enforcement account appropriation is provided
solely to implement alcohol and substance abuse treatment programs for locally
committed offenders. The juvenile rehabilitation administration shall award
these moneys on a competitive basis to counties that submitted a plan for the
provision of services approved by the division of alcohol and substance abuse.
The juvenile rehabilitation administration shall develop criteria for
evaluation of plans submitted and a timeline for awarding funding and shall
assist counties in creating and submitting plans for evaluation.

(e) $100,000 of the
general fund‑-state appropriation for fiscal year 2002 and $100,000 of
the general fund‑-state appropriation for fiscal year 2003 are provided
solely for juvenile rehabilitation administration to contract with the
institute for public policy for responsibilities assigned in chapter 338, Laws
of 1997 (juvenile code revisions).

(f) $100,000 of the
general fund‑-state appropriation for fiscal year 2002 and $100,000 of
the general fund‑-state appropriation for fiscal year 2003 are provided
solely for a contract for expanded services of the teamchild project.

(g) $423,000 of the
general fund‑-state appropriation for fiscal year 2002, (($924,000))
$787,000 of the general fund‑-state appropriation for fiscal year
2003, (($174,000)) $148,000 of the general fund‑-federal
appropriation, (($196,000)) $177,000 of the public safety and
education assistance account appropriation, and (($690,000)) $621,000
of the violence reduction and drug enforcement account appropriation are
provided solely to increase payment rates for contracted service providers.

(h) $16,000 of the
general fund‑-state appropriation for fiscal year 2002 and $16,000 of the
general fund‑-state appropriation for fiscal year 2003 are provided
solely for the implementation of chapter 167, Laws of 1999 (firearms on school
property). The amounts provided in this subsection are intended to provide
funding for county impacts associated with the implementation of chapter 167,
Laws of 1999, and shall be distributed to counties as prescribed in the current
consolidated juvenile services (CJS) formula.

(i) $3,441,000 of the
general fund‑-state appropriation for fiscal year 2002 ((and $3,441,000
of the general fund‑-state appropriation for fiscal year 2003 are)) is
provided solely for distribution to county juvenile court administrators to
fund the costs of processing truancy, children in need of services, and at-risk
youth petitions. The department shall not retain any portion of these funds to
cover administrative or any other departmental costs. The department, in
conjunction with the juvenile court administrators, shall develop an equitable
funding distribution formula. The formula shall neither reward counties with
higher than average per-petition processing costs nor shall it penalize
counties with lower than average per-petition processing costs.

(j) (($6,000,000))
$4,941,000 of the public safety and education account‑-state
appropriation is provided solely for distribution to county juvenile court
administrators to fund the costs of processing truancy, children in need of
services, and at-risk youth petitions. To the extent that distributions made
under (i) and (j) of this subsection and pursuant to section 801 of this act
exceed actual costs of processing truancy, children in need of services, and
at-risk youth petitions, the department, in consultation with the respective
juvenile court administrator and the county, may approve expenditure of funds
provided in this subsection on other costs of the civil or criminal justice
system. When this occurs, the department shall notify the office of financial
management and the legislative fiscal committees. The department shall not
retain any portion of these funds to cover administrative or any other
departmental costs. The department, in conjunction with the juvenile court
administrators, shall develop an equitable funding distribution formula. The
formula shall neither reward counties with higher than average per-petition
processing costs nor shall it penalize counties with lower than average
per-petition processing costs.

(k) The distributions
made under (i) and (j) of this subsection and distributions from the county
criminal justice assistance account made pursuant to section 801 of this act
constitute appropriate reimbursement for costs for any new programs or
increased level of service for purposes of RCW 43.135.060.

(l) Each quarter during
the 2001-03 fiscal biennium, each county shall report the number of petitions
processed and the total actual costs of processing the petitions in each of the
following categories: Truancy, children in need of services, and at-risk
youth. Counties shall submit the reports to the department no later than 45
days after the end of the quarter. The department shall forward this
information to the chair and ranking minority member of the house of
representatives appropriations committee and the senate ways and means
committee no later than 60 days after a quarter ends. These reports are deemed
informational in nature and are not for the purpose of distributing funds.

(m) $1,692,000 of the
juvenile accountability incentive account‑-federal appropriation is
provided solely for the continued implementation of a pilot program to provide
for postrelease planning and treatment of juvenile offenders with co-occurring
disorders.

(n) $22,000 of the
violence reduction and drug enforcement account appropriation is provided
solely for the evaluation of the juvenile offender co-occurring disorder pilot
program implemented pursuant to (m) of this subsection.

(o) $900,000 of the
general fund‑-state appropriation for fiscal year 2002 and (($900,000))
$150,000 of the general fund‑-state appropriation for fiscal year
2003 are provided solely for the continued implementation of the juvenile
violence prevention grant program established in section 204, chapter 309, Laws
of 1999.

(p) $33,000 of the
general fund‑-state appropriation for fiscal year 2002 and $29,000 of the
general fund‑-state appropriation for fiscal year 2003 are provided
solely for the implementation of House Bill No. 1070 (juvenile offender basic
training). If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2001, the amounts provided
in this subsection shall lapse.

(q) $21,000 of the
general fund‑-state appropriation for fiscal year 2002 and $42,000 of the
general fund‑-state appropriation for fiscal year 2003 are provided
solely for the implementation of Senate Bill No. 5468 (chemical dependency).
If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2001, the amounts provided in this
subsection shall lapse.

(r) The juvenile
rehabilitation administration, in consultation with the juvenile court
administrators, may agree on a formula to allow the transfer of funds among
amounts appropriated for consolidated juvenile services, community juvenile
accountability act grants, the chemically dependent disposition alternative,
and the special sex offender disposition alternative.

(2) INSTITUTIONAL
SERVICES

General Fund‑-State
Appropriation (FY 2002).... $ ((46,773,000))

46,857,000

General Fund‑-State
Appropriation (FY 2003).... $ ((48,735,000))

43,197,000

((General Fund‑-Federal
Appropriation............... $ 14,000))

General Fund‑-Private/Local
Appropriation...... $ ((740,000))

735,000

Violence Reduction and Drug
Enforcement Account‑-

State Appropriation........................ $ 15,280,000

TOTAL
APPROPRIATION................. $ ((111,542,000))

106,069,000

The appropriations in
this subsection are subject to the following conditions and limitations:
$40,000 of the general fund‑-state appropriation for fiscal year 2002 and
(($84,000)) $71,000 of the general fund‑-state
appropriation for fiscal year 2003 are provided solely to increase payment
rates for contracted service providers.

(3) PROGRAM SUPPORT

General Fund‑-State
Appropriation (FY 2002).... $ 1,738,000

General Fund‑-State
Appropriation (FY 2003).... $ ((1,765,000))

1,766,000

General Fund‑-Federal
Appropriation............. $.................................. ((307,000))

306,000

Juvenile Accountability
Incentive Account‑-Federal

Appropriation.............................. $ 1,100,000

Violence Reduction and Drug
Enforcement Account‑-

State Appropriation........................ $ 421,000

TOTAL
APPROPRIATION................. $ 5,331,000

Sec. 204. 2001 2nd sp.s. c 7 s 204
(uncodified) is amended to read as follows:

FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF
SOCIAL AND HEALTH SERVICES‑-MENTAL HEALTH PROGRAM

(1) COMMUNITY
SERVICES/REGIONAL SUPPORT NETWORKS

General Fund‑-State
Appropriation (FY 2002).... $ ((191,089,000))

195,266,000

General Fund‑-State
Appropriation (FY 2003).... $ ((194,884,000))

181,973,000

General Fund‑-Federal
Appropriation............. $.................................. ((339,077,000))

358,517,000

General Fund‑-Local
Appropriation.............. $ ((4,363,000))

21,133,000

Health Services Account‑-State

Appropriation.............................. $ 2,450,000

TOTAL
APPROPRIATION................. $ ((731,863,000))

759,339,000

The appropriations in
this subsection are subject to the following conditions and limitations:

(a) Regional support
networks shall use portions of the general fund‑-state appropriation for
implementation of working agreements with the vocational rehabilitation program
which will maximize the use of federal funding for vocational programs.

(b) From the general
fund‑-state appropriations in this subsection, the secretary of social
and health services shall assure that regional support networks reimburse the
aging and adult services program for the general fund‑-state cost of
medicaid personal care services that enrolled regional support network
consumers use because of their psychiatric disability.

(c) $388,000 of the
general fund‑-state appropriation for fiscal year 2002, (($1,927,000))
$2,829,000 of the general fund‑-state appropriation for fiscal
year 2003, and (($2,349,000)) $3,157,000 of the general fund‑-federal
appropriation are provided solely for development and operation of community
residential and support services for persons whose treatment needs constitute
substantial barriers to community placement and who no longer require active
psychiatric treatment at an inpatient hospital level of care, no longer meet
the criteria for inpatient involuntary commitment, and who are clinically ready
for discharge from a state psychiatric hospital. In the event that enough
patients are not transitioned or diverted from the state hospitals to close at
least two hospital wards by July 2002, and ((two)) four additional
wards by April 2003, a proportional share of these funds shall be transferred
to the appropriations in subsection (2) of this section to support continued
care of the patients in the state hospitals. Primary responsibility and
accountability for provision of appropriate community support for persons
placed with these funds shall reside with the mental health program and the
regional support networks, with partnership and active support from the alcohol
and substance abuse and from the aging and adult services programs. The
department shall negotiate performance-based incentive contracts ((with
those regional support networks which have the most viable plans for providing
appropriate community support services for significant numbers of persons from their
area who would otherwise be served in the state hospitals)) to provide
appropriate community support services for individuals leaving the state
hospitals under this subsection. The department shall first seek to contract
with regional support networks before offering a contract to any other party.
The funds appropriated in this subsection shall not be considered
"available resources" as defined in RCW 71.24.025 and are not subject
to the standard allocation formula applied in accordance with RCW 71.24.035(13)(a).

(d) At least $1,000,000
of the federal block grant funding appropriated in this subsection shall be
used for (i) initial development, training, and operation of the community
support teams which will work with long-term state hospital residents prior and
subsequent to their return to the community; and (ii) development of support
strategies which will reduce the unnecessary and excessive use of state and
local hospitals for short-term crisis stabilization services. Such strategies
may include training and technical assistance to community long-term care and
substance abuse providers; the development of diversion beds and stabilization
support teams; examination of state hospital policies regarding admissions; and
the development of new contractual standards to assure that the statutory
requirement that 85 percent of short-term detentions be managed locally is
being fulfilled. The department shall report to the fiscal and policy
committees of the legislature on the results of these efforts by November 1, 2001,
and again by November 1, 2002.

(e) The department is
authorized to implement a new formula for allocating available resources among
the regional support networks. The distribution formula shall use the number
of persons eligible for the state medical programs funded under chapter 74.09
RCW as the measure of the requirement for the number of acutely mentally ill,
chronically mentally ill, severely emotionally disturbed children, and
seriously disturbed in accordance with RCW 71.24.035(13)(a). The new formula
shall be phased in over a period of no less than six years. Furthermore, the
department shall increase the medicaid capitation rates which a regional
support network would otherwise receive under the formula by an amount
sufficient to assure that total funding allocated to the regional support
network in fiscal year 2002 increases by up to ((2.1)) 3.5
percent over the amount actually paid to that regional support network in
fiscal year 2001, and by up to an additional ((2.3)) 5.0 percent
in fiscal year 2003, if total funding to the regional support network would
otherwise increase by less than those percentages under the new formula, and
provided that the nonfederal share of the higher medicaid payment rate is
provided by the regional support network from local funds.

(f) Within funds
appropriated in this subsection, the department shall contract with the Clark
county regional support network for development and operation of a project
demonstrating collaborative methods for providing intensive mental health
services in the school setting for severely emotionally disturbed children who
are medicaid eligible. Project services are to be delivered by teachers and
teaching assistants who qualify as, or who are under the supervision of, mental
health professionals meeting the requirements of chapter 275-57 WAC. The
department shall increase medicaid payments to the regional support network by
the amount necessary to cover the necessary and allowable costs of the
demonstration, not to exceed the upper payment limit specified for the regional
support network in the department's medicaid waiver agreement with the federal
government after meeting all other medicaid spending requirements assumed in
this subsection. The regional support network shall provide the department
with (i) periodic reports on project service levels, methods, and outcomes; and
(ii) an intergovernmental transfer equal to the state share of the increased
medicaid payment provided for operation of this project.

(g) The health services
account appropriation is provided solely for implementation of strategies which
the department and the affected regional support networks conclude will best
assure continued availability of community-based inpatient psychiatric services
in all areas of the state. Such strategies may include, but are not limited
to, emergency contracts for continued operation of inpatient facilities
otherwise at risk of closure because of demonstrated uncompensated care;
start-up grants for development of evaluation and treatment facilities; and
increases in the rate paid for inpatient psychiatric services for medically
indigent and/or general assistance for the unemployed patients. The funds
provided in this subsection must be: (i) Prioritized for use in those areas of
the state which are at greatest risk of lacking sufficient inpatient
psychiatric treatment capacity, rather than being distributed on a formula
basis; (ii) prioritized for use by those hospitals which do not receive
low-income disproportionate share hospital payments as of the date of
application for funding; and (iii) matched on a one-quarter local,
three-quarters state basis by funding from the regional support network or
networks in the area in which the funds are expended. Payments from the amount
provided in this subsection shall not be made to any provider that has not
agreed that, except for prospective rate increases, the payment shall offset,
on a dollar-for-dollar basis, any liability that may be established against, or
any settlement that may be agreed to by the state, regarding the rate of state
reimbursement for inpatient psychiatric care. The funds provided in this
subsection shall not be considered "available resources" as defined
in RCW 71.24.025 and are not subject to the distribution formula established
pursuant to RCW 71.24.035.

(h) The department
shall assure that each regional support network increases spending on direct
client services in fiscal years 2002 and 2003 by at least the same percentage
as the total state, federal, and local funds allocated to the regional support
network in those years exceeds the amounts allocated to it in fiscal year 2001.

(i) The department
shall reduce state funding otherwise payable to a regional support network in
fiscal years 2002 and 2003 by the full amount by which the regional support
network's reserves and fund balances as of December 31, 2001, exceed the
required risk reserve for that regional support network. The required reserve
amount shall be calculated by applying the risk reserve percentage specified in
the department's contract with the regional support network to the total state
and federal revenues for which the regional support network would otherwise be
eligible in accordance with this subsection. As used in this subsection,
"reserves" does not include capital project reserves established in
accordance with state accounting and reporting standards before January 1,
2002.

(j) The department
shall maintain the same relative allocation of budgeted, nonforensic state
hospital beds among the regional support networks as was in effect during
fiscal year 2002 until at least thirty days after adjournment of the first
regular legislative session following submission of a report on the appropriate
allocation of these beds. In preparing the report, the department shall: (i)
Utilize the most current and reliable applicable academic research, and shall
consult with academic and other national experts on mental health inpatient
care; (ii) estimate the relative need for short-term and long-term inpatient psychiatric
care in each of the state's regions, based upon the factors that the experts
identify as the best predictors of need, including geographic proximity to the
hospitals; and (iii) identify options for changing the current distribution of
state hospital beds among the regional support networks. The report shall be
prepared in consultation with representatives of people with mental illness and
the regional support networks, and shall be submitted to appropriate committees
of the legislature. This subsection does not prohibit the replacement of
current state hospital beds with community alternatives as provided elsewhere
in this section.

(k) The department
shall develop a proposal to consolidate and organize existing ombudsman
functions in regional support networks and the state hospitals into a single
structure that is functionally independent of the existing mental health
service delivery system. The proposal shall include recommendations as to the
statutory and administrative changes needed to establish a functional statewide
mental health ombudsman program. The department shall report to the
appropriate policy and fiscal committees of the senate and house of
representatives by November 1, 2002.

(2) INSTITUTIONAL
SERVICES

General Fund‑-State
Appropriation (FY 2002).... $ ((85,836,000))

84,075,000

General Fund‑-State
Appropriation (FY 2003).... $ ((83,001,000))

80,887,000

General Fund‑-Federal
Appropriation............. $.................................. ((139,098,000))

140,131,000

General Fund‑-Private/Local
Appropriation...... $ ((29,289,000))

29,920,000

TOTAL
APPROPRIATION................. $ ((337,224,000))

335,013,000

The appropriations in
this subsection are subject to the following conditions and limitations:

(a) The state mental
hospitals may use funds appropriated in this subsection to purchase goods and
supplies through hospital group purchasing organizations when it is
cost-effective to do so.

(b) The mental health
program at Western state hospital shall continue to use labor provided by the
Tacoma prerelease program of the department of corrections.

(c) The department
shall seek to reduce the census of the two state psychiatric hospitals by ((120))
178 beds by April 2003 by arranging and providing community residential,
mental health, and other support services for long-term state hospital patients
whose treatment needs constitute substantial barriers to community placement
and who no longer require active psychiatric treatment at an inpatient hospital
level of care, no longer meet the criteria for inpatient involuntary
commitment, and who are clinically ready for discharge from a state psychiatric
hospital. No such patient is to move from the hospital until a team of
community professionals has become familiar with the person and their treatment
plan; assessed their strengths, preferences, and needs; arranged a safe,
clinically-appropriate, and stable place for them to live; assured that other
needed medical, behavioral, and social services are in place; and is contracted
to monitor the person's progress on an ongoing basis. The department and the
regional support networks shall endeavor to assure that hospital patients are
able to return to their area of origin, and that placements are not
concentrated in proximity to the hospitals.

(d) For each month
subsequent to the month in which a state hospital bed has been closed in
accordance with (c) of this subsection, the mental health program shall
transfer to the medical assistance program state funds equal to the state share
of the monthly per capita expenditure amount estimated for categorically
needy-disabled persons in the most recent forecast of medical assistance
expenditures.

(e) The department
shall report to the appropriate committees of the legislature by November 1,
2001, and by November 1, 2002, on its plans for and progress toward achieving
the objectives set forth in (c) of this subsection.

(3) CIVIL COMMITMENT

General Fund‑-State
Appropriation (FY 2002).... $ ((20,037,000))

18,017,000

General Fund‑-State
Appropriation (FY 2003).... $ ((22,441,000))

20,085,000

TOTAL
APPROPRIATION................. $ ((42,478,000))

38,102,000

The appropriations in
this subsection are subject to the following conditions and limitations:

(a) (($2,062,000))
$1,587,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal year 2002
and (($3,698,000)) $2,646,000 of the general fund--state
appropriation for fiscal year 2003 are provided solely for operational costs
associated with a less restrictive step-down placement facility on McNeil
Island.

(b) (($1,000,000 of
the general fund‑-state appropriation for fiscal year 2002 and $1,000,000
of the general fund‑-state appropriation for fiscal year 2003 are
provided solely for mitigation funding for jurisdictions affected by the
placement of less restrictive alternative facilities for persons conditionally
released from the special commitment center facility being constructed on
McNeil Island.

(c))) By October 1, 2001, the department shall
report to the office of financial management and the fiscal committees of the
house of representatives and senate detailing information on plans for
increasing the efficiency of staffing patterns at the new civil commitment
center facility being constructed on McNeil Island.

(4) SPECIAL PROJECTS

General Fund‑-State
Appropriation (FY 2002).... $ 444,000

General Fund‑-State
Appropriation (FY 2003).... $ 443,000

General Fund‑-Federal
Appropriation............. $.................................. 2,082,000

TOTAL
APPROPRIATION................. $ 2,969,000

(5) PROGRAM SUPPORT

General Fund‑-State
Appropriation (FY 2002).... $ 3,104,000

General Fund‑-State
Appropriation (FY 2003).... $ ((3,231,000))

3,233,000

General Fund‑-Federal
Appropriation............. $.................................. ((5,796,000))

5,794,000

TOTAL
APPROPRIATION................. $ 12,131,000

The appropriations in
this subsection are subject to the following conditions and limitations:

(a) $113,000 of the
general fund‑-state appropriation for fiscal year 2002, $125,000 of the
general fund‑-state appropriation for fiscal year 2003, and $164,000 of
the general fund‑-federal appropriation are provided solely for the
institute for public policy to evaluate the impacts of chapter 214, Laws of
1999 (mentally ill offenders), chapter 217, Laws of 2000 (atypical
anti-psychotic medications), chapter 297, Laws of 1998 (commitment of mentally
ill persons), and chapter 334, Laws of 2001 (mental health performance audit).

(b) $168,000 of the
general fund‑-state appropriation for fiscal year 2002, $243,000 of the
general fund‑-state appropriation for fiscal year 2003, and $411,000 of
the general fund‑-federal appropriation are provided solely for the development
and implementation of a uniform outcome-oriented performance measurement system
to be used in evaluating and managing the community mental health service
delivery system consistent with the recommendations contained in the joint
legislative audit and review committee's audit of the public mental health
system. Once implemented, the use of performance measures will allow
comparison of measurement results to established standards and benchmarks among
regional support networks, service providers, and against other states. The
department shall provide a report to the appropriate committees of the
legislature on the development and implementation of the use of performance
measures by October 2002.

(c) $125,000 of the
general fund‑‑state appropriation for fiscal year 2002, $125,000 of
the general fund‑‑state appropriation for fiscal year 2003, and
$250,000 of the general fund‑‑federal appropriation are provided
solely for a study of the prevalence of mental illness among the state's
regional support networks. The study shall examine how reasonable estimates of
the prevalence of mental illness relate to the incidence of persons enrolled in
medical assistance programs in each regional support network area. In
conducting this study, the department shall consult with the joint legislative
audit and review committee, regional support networks, community mental health
providers, and mental health consumer representatives. The department shall
submit a final report on its findings to the fiscal, health care, and human
services committees of the legislature by November 1, 2003.

Sec. 205. 2001 2nd sp.s. c 7 s 205
(uncodified) is amended to read as follows:

FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF
SOCIAL AND HEALTH SERVICES‑-DEVELOPMENTAL
DISABILITIES PROGRAM

In the event that
the cumulative expenditure pattern for this program indicates that fiscal year
appropriations are insufficient to cover program costs, the department shall
take necessary steps to reduce expenditures so that total program costs will
not exceed the annual appropriation authority. The department will notify the
fiscal committees of the legislature prior to taking such action.

(1) COMMUNITY SERVICES

General Fund‑-State
Appropriation (FY 2002).... $ ((231,693,000))

233,964,000

General Fund‑-State
Appropriation (FY 2003).... $ ((242,347,000))

243,617,000

General Fund‑-Federal
Appropriation............. $.................................. ((396,151,000))

401,227,000

Health Services Account‑-State

Appropriation.............................. $ ((741,000))

903,000

TOTAL
APPROPRIATION................. $ ((870,932,000))

879,711,000

The appropriations in
this subsection are subject to the following conditions and limitations:

(a) The health services
account appropriation and (($753,000)) $904,000 of the general
fund‑-federal appropriation are provided solely for health care benefits
for home care workers with family incomes below 200 percent of the federal
poverty level who are employed through state contracts for twenty hours per
week or more. Premium payments for individual provider home care workers shall
be made only to the subsidized basic health plan. Home care agencies may
obtain coverage either through the basic health plan or through an alternative
plan with substantially equivalent benefits.

(b) $902,000 of the
general fund‑-state appropriation for fiscal year 2002, $3,372,000 of the
general fund‑-state appropriation for fiscal year 2003, and $4,056,000 of
the general fund‑-federal appropriation are provided solely for community
services for residents of residential habilitation centers (RHCs) who are able
to be adequately cared for in community settings and who choose to live in
those community settings. The department shall ensure that the average cost
per day for all program services other than start-up costs shall not exceed
$280. If the number and timing of residents choosing to move into community
settings is not sufficient to achieve the RHC cottage consolidation plan
assumed in the appropriations in subsection (2) of this section, the department
shall transfer sufficient appropriations from this subsection to subsection (2)
of this section to cover the added costs incurred in the RHCs. The department
shall report to the appropriate committees of the legislature, within 45 days
following each fiscal year quarter, the number of residents moving into
community settings and the actual expenditures for all community services to
support those residents.

(c) (($1,440,000))
$1,153,000 of the general fund‑-state appropriation for fiscal
year 2002, (($3,041,000)) $3,054,000 of the general fund‑-state
appropriation for fiscal year 2003, and (($4,311,000)) $4,031,000
of the general fund‑-federal appropriation are provided solely for
expanded community services for persons with developmental disabilities who
also have community protection issues or are diverted or discharged from state
psychiatric hospitals. The department shall ensure that the average cost per
day for all program services other than start-up costs shall not exceed $275.
The department shall report to the appropriate committees of the legislature,
within 45 days following each fiscal year quarter, the number of persons served
with these additional community services, where they were residing, what kinds
of services they were receiving prior to placement, and the actual expenditures
for all community services to support these clients.

(d) (($1,005,000))
$259,000 of the general fund‑-state appropriation for fiscal year
2002, (($2,262,000)) $354,000 of the general fund‑-state
appropriation for fiscal year 2003, and (($2,588,000)) $485,000
of the general fund‑-federal appropriation are provided solely for
increasing case/resource management resources to improve oversight and quality
of care for persons enrolled in the medicaid home and community services waiver
for persons with developmental disabilities. The department shall not increase
total enrollment in home and community based waivers for persons with
developmental disabilities except for ((increases)) changes
assumed in additional funding provided in subsections (b) and (c) of this
section. Prior to submitting to the health care financing authority any ((additional))
new or renewed home and community based waiver requests for
persons with developmental disabilities, the department shall submit a summary
of the waiver request to the appropriate committees of the legislature. The
summary shall include eligibility criteria, program description, enrollment
projections and limits, and budget and cost effectiveness projections that
distinguish the requested waiver from other existing or proposed waivers.

(e) $1,000,000 of the
general fund‑-state appropriation for fiscal year 2002 and $1,000,000 of
the general fund‑-state appropriation for fiscal year 2003 are provided
solely for employment, or other day activities and training programs, for young
adults with developmental disabilities who complete their high school
curriculum in 2001 or 2002. These services are intended to assist with the
transition to work and more independent living. Funding shall be used to the
greatest extent possible for vocational rehabilitation services matched with
federal funding. In recent years, the state general fund appropriation for
employment and day programs has been underspent. These surpluses, built into
the carry forward level budget, shall be redeployed for high school transition
services.

(f) $369,000 of the
fiscal year 2002 general fund‑-state appropriation and $369,000 of the
fiscal year 2003 general fund‑-state appropriation are provided solely
for continuation of the autism pilot project started in 1999.

(g) $4,049,000 of the
general fund‑-state appropriation for fiscal year 2002, $1,734,000 of the
general fund‑-state appropriation for fiscal year 2003, and $5,369,000 of
the general fund‑-federal appropriation are provided solely to increase
compensation by an average of fifty cents per hour for low-wage workers
providing state-funded services to persons with developmental disabilities.
These funds, along with funding provided for vendor rate increases, are
sufficient to raise wages an average of fifty cents and cover the employer
share of unemployment and social security taxes on the amount of the wage
increase. In consultation with the statewide associations representing such
agencies, the department shall establish a mechanism for testing the extent to
which funds have been used for this purpose, and report the results to the
fiscal committees of the legislature by February 1, 2002.

(h) Up to
$10,000,000 of funding for existing family support shall be provided as
supplemental security income (SSI) state supplemental payments to the parent or
legal guardian, on behalf of an eligible individual, and shall be considered a
benefit to the eligible individual. Individuals receiving family support
payments shall not become eligible for medical assistance under RCW 74.09.510
due solely to the receipt of the SSI state supplemental payment. The
department shall reassess individuals who are on the home and community based waiver
primarily for family support for transition to SSI state supplemental
payments. The department in coordination with the economic services
administration will create an application and process for determining
eligibility of applicants. Eligibility shall require at least the following:
(i) A statement that the family resides in this state, (ii) verification that
the eligible individual meets the definition of developmental disability in RCW
71A.10.020, (iii) a statement that the eligible individual resides, or is
expected to reside, with his or her parent or legal guardian or, another
relative, and (iv) verification that the taxable income for the family for the
year immediately preceding the date of application did not exceed 200 percent
of the federal poverty level, unless it can be verified that the taxable income
for the year in which the application is made will be less than 200 percent of
the federal poverty level. The department, in coordination with the economic
services administration, will report to the appropriate committees of the
legislature on implementation of this subsection (h) by December 1, 2002.

(2) INSTITUTIONAL
SERVICES

General Fund‑-State
Appropriation (FY 2002).... $ ((71,977,000))

71,729,000

General Fund‑-State
Appropriation (FY 2003).... $ ((69,303,000))

68,084,000

General Fund‑-Federal
Appropriation............. $.................................. ((145,641,000))

143,199,000

General Fund‑-Private/Local
Appropriation...... $ ((10,230,000))

11,230,000

TOTAL
APPROPRIATION................. $ ((297,151,000))

294,242,000

The appropriations in
this subsection are subject to the following conditions and limitations:
Pursuant to RCW 71A.12.160, if residential habilitation center capacity is not
being used for permanent residents, the department may make residential habilitation
center vacancies available for respite care and any other services needed to
care for clients who are not currently being served in a residential
habilitation center and whose needs require staffing levels similar to current
residential habilitation center residents. Providing respite care shall not
impede the department's ability to consolidate cottages as assumed in the
appropriations in this subsection.

(3) PROGRAM SUPPORT

General Fund‑-State
Appropriation (FY 2002).... $ ((2,601,000))

1,711,000

General Fund‑-State
Appropriation (FY 2003).... $ ((2,623,000))

1,737,000

General Fund‑-Federal
Appropriation............. $.................................. ((2,413,000))

2,442,000

Telecommunications
Devices for the Hearing and

Speech Impaired
Account Appropriation...... $ 1,767,000

TOTAL
APPROPRIATION ................. $ ((7,637,000))

7,657,000

The appropriations in
this subsection are subject to the following conditions and limitations: (($50,000
of the fiscal year 2002 general fund‑-state appropriation and $50,000 of
the fiscal year 2003 general fund‑-state appropriation are)) $100,000
of the telecommunications devices for the hearing and speech impaired account
appropriation is provided solely for increasing the contract amount for the
southeast Washington deaf and hard of hearing services center due to increased
workload.

(4) SPECIAL PROJECTS

General Fund‑-Federal
Appropriation............. $.................................. 11,995,000

Sec. 206. 2001 2nd sp.s. c 7 s 206
(uncodified) is amended to read as follows:

FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF
SOCIAL AND HEALTH SERVICES‑-AGING AND ADULT SERVICES
PROGRAM

General Fund‑-State
Appropriation (FY 2002).... $ ((518,911,000))

506,255,000

General Fund‑-State
Appropriation (FY 2003).... $ ((537,907,000))

508,481,000

General Fund‑-Federal
Appropriation............. $.................................. ((1,078,417,000))

1,031,079,000

General Fund‑-Private/Local
Appropriation...... $ ((4,324,000))

4,245,000

Health Services Account‑-State

Appropriation.............................. $ 4,523,000

TOTAL
APPROPRIATION................. $ ((2,144,082,000))

2,054,583,000

The appropriations in
this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations:

(1) The entire health
services account appropriation, $1,210,000 of the general fund‑-state
appropriation for fiscal year 2002, $1,423,000 of the general fund‑-state
appropriation for fiscal year 2003, and $6,794,000 of the general fund‑-federal
appropriation are provided solely for health care benefits for home care
workers who are employed through state contracts for at least twenty hours per
week. Premium payments for individual provider home care workers shall be made
only to the subsidized basic health plan, and only for persons with incomes
below 200 percent of the federal poverty level. Home care agencies may obtain
coverage either through the basic health plan or through an alternative plan
with substantially equivalent benefits.

(2) $1,706,000 of the
general fund‑-state appropriation for fiscal year 2002 and $1,706,000 of
the general fund‑-state appropriation for fiscal year 2003, plus the
associated vendor rate increase for each year, are provided solely for
operation of the volunteer chore services program.

(3) For purposes of
implementing chapter 74.46 RCW, the weighted average nursing facility payment
rate shall be no more than $128.79 for fiscal year 2002, and no more than (($134.45))
$127.46 for fiscal year 2003. For all facilities, the therapy care,
support services, and operations component rates established in accordance with
chapter 74.46 RCW shall be adjusted for economic trends and conditions by 2.1
percent effective July 1, 2001, and by an additional ((2.3)) 2.0
percent effective ((July)) September 1, 2002. For case-mix
facilities, direct care component rates established in accordance with chapter
74.46 RCW shall also be adjusted for economic trends and conditions by 2.1
percent effective July 1, 2001, and by an additional ((2.3)) 2.0
percent effective ((July)) September 1, 2002. Additionally, to
facilitate the transition to a fully case-mix based direct care payment system,
the median price per case-mix unit for each of the applicable direct care peer
groups shall be increased on a one-time basis by 2.64 percent effective July 1,
2002.

(4) In accordance with
Substitute House Bill No. 2242 (nursing home rates), the department shall issue
certificates of capital authorization which result in up to $10 million of
increased asset value completed and ready for occupancy in fiscal year 2003; in
up to $27 million of increased asset value completed and ready for occupancy in
fiscal year 2004; and in up to $27 million of increased asset value completed
and ready for occupancy in fiscal year 2005.

(5) Adult day health
services shall not be considered a duplication of services for persons
receiving care in long-term care settings licensed under chapter 18.20, 72.36,
or 70.128 RCW.

(6) Within funds
appropriated in this section and in section 204 of this act, the aging and
adult services program shall coordinate with and actively support the efforts
of the mental health program and of the regional support networks to provide
stable community living arrangements for persons with dementia and traumatic
brain injuries who have been long-term residents of the state psychiatric
hospitals. The aging and adult services program shall report to the health
care and fiscal committees of the legislature by November 1, 2001, and by
November 1, 2002, on the actions it has taken to achieve this objective.

(7) Within funds
appropriated in this section and in section 204 of this act, the aging and
adult services program shall devise and implement strategies in partnership
with the mental health program and the regional support networks to reduce the
use of state and local psychiatric hospitals for the short-term stabilization
of persons with dementia and traumatic brain injuries. Such strategies may
include training and technical assistance to help long-term care providers
avoid and manage behaviors which might otherwise result in psychiatric
hospitalizations; monitoring long-term care facilities to assure residents are
receiving appropriate mental health care and are not being inappropriately
medicated or hospitalized; the development of diversion beds and stabilization
support teams; and the establishment of systems to track the use of psychiatric
hospitals by long-term care providers. The aging and adult services program
shall report to the health care and fiscal committees of the legislature by
November 1, 2001, and by November 1, 2002, on the actions it has taken to
achieve this objective.

(8) In accordance with
Substitute House Bill No. 1341, the department may implement two medicaid
waiver programs for persons who do not qualify for such services as
categorically needy, subject to federal approval and the following conditions
and limitations:

(a) One waiver program
shall include coverage of home-based services, and the second shall include
coverage of care in community residential facilities. Enrollment in the waiver
covering home-based services shall not exceed ((150)) 15 persons
by the end of fiscal year 2002, nor ((200)) 163 persons by the
end of fiscal year 2003. Enrollment in the waiver covering community
residential services shall not exceed ((500)) 50 persons by the
end of fiscal year 2002, nor ((900)) 600 persons by the end of
fiscal year 2003.

(b) For each month of
waiver service delivered to a person who was not covered by medicaid prior to
their enrollment in the waiver, the aging and adult services program shall
transfer to the medical assistance program state and federal funds equal to the
monthly per capita expenditure amount, net of drug rebates, estimated for
medically needy-aged persons in the most recent forecast of medical assistance
expenditures.

(c) The department
shall identify the number of medically needy nursing home residents, and
enrollment and expenditures on each of the two medically needy waivers, on
monthly management reports.

(d) The department
shall track and report to health care and fiscal committees of the legislature
by November 15, 2002, on the types of long-term care support a sample of waiver
participants were receiving prior to their enrollment in the waiver, how those
services were being paid for, and an assessment of their adequacy.

(9) $50,000 of the
general fund‑-state appropriation for fiscal year 2002 and $50,000 of the
general fund‑-state appropriation for fiscal year 2003 are provided
solely for payments to any nursing facility licensed under chapter 18.51 RCW
which meets all of the following criteria: (a) The nursing home entered into
an arm's length agreement for a facility lease prior to January 1, 1980; (b)
the lessee purchased the leased nursing home after January 1, 1980; and (c) the
lessor defaulted on its loan or mortgage for the assets of the home after
January 1, 1991, and prior to January 1, 1992. Payments provided pursuant to this
subsection shall not be subject to the settlement, audit, or rate-setting
requirements contained in chapter 74.46 RCW.

(10) $364,000 of the
general fund‑-state appropriation for fiscal year 2002, $364,000 of the
general fund‑-state appropriation for fiscal year 2003, and $740,000 of
the general fund‑-federal appropriation are provided solely for payment
of exceptional care rates so that persons with Alzheimer's disease and related
dementias who might otherwise require nursing home or state hospital care can
instead be served in boarding home-licensed facilities which specialize in the
care of such conditions.

(11) From funds
appropriated in this section, the department shall increase compensation for
individual and for agency home care providers. Payments to individual home
care providers are to be increased from $7.18 per hour to $7.68 per hour on
July 1, 2001. Payments to agency providers are to be increased to $13.30 per
hour on July 1, 2001, and to $13.44 per hour on July 1, 2002. All but 18 cents
per hour of the July 1, 2001, increase to agency providers is to be used to
increase wages for direct care workers. The appropriations in this section
also include the funds needed for the employer share of unemployment and social
security taxes on the amount of the wage increase required by this subsection.

(12) $2,507,000 of the
general fund‑-state appropriation for fiscal year 2002, $2,595,000 of the
general fund‑-state appropriation for fiscal year 2003, and $5,100,000 of
the general fund‑-federal appropriation are provided solely for
prospective rate increases intended to increase compensation by an average of
fifty cents per hour for low-wage workers in agencies which contract with the
state to provide community residential services for persons with functional
disabilities. In consultation with the statewide associations representing
such agencies, the department shall establish a mechanism for testing the
extent to which funds have been used for this purpose, and report the results
to the fiscal committees of the legislature by February 1, 2002. The amounts
in this subsection also include the funds needed for the employer share of
unemployment and social security taxes on the amount of the wage increase.

(13) $1,082,000 of the
general fund‑-state appropriation for fiscal year 2002, $1,082,000 of the
general fund‑-state appropriation for fiscal year 2003, and $2,204,000 of
the general fund‑-federal appropriation are provided solely for
prospective rate increases intended to increase compensation for low-wage
workers in nursing homes which contract with the state. For fiscal year 2002,
the department shall add forty-five cents per patient day to the direct care
rate which would otherwise be paid to each nursing facility in accordance with
chapter 74.46 RCW. For fiscal year 2003, the department shall increase the
median price per case-mix unit for each of the applicable peer groups by
six-tenths of one percent in order to distribute the available funds. Beginning
July 1, 2002, for a specific nursing facility to be eligible for the rate
increases provided in this subsection, the facility shall submit the following
to the department:

(a) Proof of a
legally binding, written commitment to increase the salaries, wages, or
benefits of existing and newly hired low-wage workers, excluding managers,
administrators, and contract employees, during the rate year;

(b) Proof of the
existence of a method of enforcement of the commitment, such as arbitration,
that is available to the employees or their representative, and proof that such
a method is expeditious, uses a neutral decision maker, and is economical for
the employees; and

(c) Proof that the
specific nursing facility has provided written notice of the terms of the
commitment and the availability of the enforcement mechanism to the relevant
employees or their recognized representatives.

(14) In
consultation with the statewide associations representing nursing facilities,
the department shall establish a mechanism for testing the extent to which
funds have been used for ((this)) the purposes of subsection
(13) of this section, and report the results to the fiscal committees of
the legislature by February 1, ((2002)) 2003.

(15) $43,000 of the
general fund‑-state appropriation for fiscal year 2003 and $42,000 of the
general fund‑-federal appropriation are provided solely for the
implementation of Substitute House Bill No. 2604 (unemployment compensation).
If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2002, the amounts provided in this
subsection shall lapse.

(16) In the event
that the cumulative expenditure pattern for this program indicates that fiscal
year appropriations are insufficient to cover program costs, the department
shall take necessary steps to reduce expenditures so that total program costs
will not exceed the annual appropriation authority. The department will notify
the fiscal committees of the legislature prior to taking such action.

Sec. 207. 2001 2nd sp.s. c 7 s 207
(uncodified) is amended to read as follows:

FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF
SOCIAL AND HEALTH SERVICES‑-ECONOMIC SERVICES
PROGRAM

General Fund‑-State
Appropriation (FY 2002).... $ ((436,440,000))

442,984,000

General Fund‑-State
Appropriation (FY 2003).... $ ((424,870,000))

397,519,000

General Fund‑-Federal
Appropriation............. $.................................. ((1,356,351,000))

1,359,544,000

General Fund‑-Private/Local
Appropriation...... $ ((31,788,000))

33,880,000

TOTAL
APPROPRIATION................. $ ((2,249,449,000))

2,233,927,000

The appropriations in
this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations:

(1) (($282,081,000))
$281,035,000 of the general fund‑-state appropriation for fiscal
year 2002, (($278,277,000)) $277,231,000 of the general fund‑-state
appropriation for fiscal year 2003, $1,254,197,000 of the general fund‑-federal
appropriation, and (($29,352,000)) $31,444,000 of the general
fund‑-local appropriation are provided solely for the WorkFirst program
and child support operations. WorkFirst expenditures include TANF grants,
diversion services, subsidized child care, employment and training, other
WorkFirst related services, allocated field services operating costs, and
allocated economic services program administrative costs. Within the amounts
provided in this subsection, the department shall:

(a) Continue to
implement WorkFirst program improvements that are designed to achieve progress
against outcome measures specified in RCW 74.08A.410. Valid outcome measures of
job retention and wage progression shall be developed and reported quarterly to
appropriate fiscal and policy committees of the legislature for families who
leave assistance, measured after 12 months, 24 months, and 36 months. An
increased attention to job retention and wage progression is necessary to
emphasize the legislature's goal that the WorkFirst program succeed in helping
recipients gain long-term economic independence and not cycle on and off public
assistance. The wage progression measure shall report the median percentage
increase in quarterly earnings and hourly wage after 12 months, 24 months, and
36 months. The wage progression report shall also report the percent with
earnings above one hundred percent and two hundred percent of the federal
poverty level. The report shall compare former WorkFirst participants with
similar workers who did not participate in WorkFirst. The department shall
also report the percentage of families who have returned to temporary
assistance for needy families after 12 months, 24 months, and 36 months.

(b) Develop
informational materials that educate families about the difference between cash
assistance and work support benefits. These materials must explain, among
other facts, that the benefits are designed to support their employment, that
there are no time limits on the receipt of work support benefits, and that
immigration or residency status will not be affected by the receipt of
benefits. These materials shall be posted in all community service offices and
distributed to families. Materials must be available in multiple languages.
When a family leaves the temporary assistance for needy families program,
receives cash diversion assistance, or withdraws a temporary assistance for
needy families application, the department of social and health services shall
educate them about the difference between cash assistance and work support
benefits and offer them the opportunity to begin or to continue receiving work
support benefits, so long as they are eligible. The department shall provide
this information through in-person interviews, over the telephone, and/or
through the mail. Work support benefits include food stamps, medicaid for all
family members, medicaid or state children's health insurance program for
children, and child care assistance. The department shall report annually to
the legislature the number of families who have had exit interviews, been
reached successfully by phone, and been sent mail. The report shall also
include the percentage of families who elect to continue each of the benefits
and the percentage found ineligible by each substantive reason code. A
substantive reason code shall not be "other." The report shall
identify barriers to informing families about work support benefits and
describe existing and future actions to overcome such barriers.

(c) From the amounts
provided in this subsection, provide $50,000 from the general fund‑-state
appropriation for fiscal year 2002 and $50,000 from the general fund‑-state
appropriation for fiscal year 2003 to the Washington institute for public
policy for continuation of the WorkFirst evaluation database.

(d) Submit a report by
December 1, 2001, to the fiscal committees of the legislature containing a
spending plan for the WorkFirst program. The plan shall identify how spending
levels in the 2001-2003 biennium will be adjusted by June 30, 2003, to be
sustainable within available federal grant levels and the carryforward level of
state funds.

(2) (($48,341,000))
$54,623,000 of the general fund‑-state appropriation for fiscal
year 2002 and (($48,341,000)) $45,055,000 of the general fund‑-state
appropriation for fiscal year 2003 are provided solely for cash assistance and
other services to recipients in the general assistance‑-unemployable
program. Within these amounts, the department may expend funds for services
that assist recipients to reduce their dependence on public assistance,
provided that expenditures for these services and cash assistance do not exceed
the funds provided. The department shall make administrative and
eligibility changes, including those described in House Bill No. 3009 (social
service programs), to the program in order to achieve savings assumed in this
subsection.

(3) $5,632,000 of the
general fund‑-state appropriation for fiscal year 2002 and (($5,632,000))
$1,132,000 of the general fund‑-state appropriation for fiscal
year 2003 are provided solely for the food assistance program for legal
immigrants. The level of benefits shall be equivalent to the benefits provided
by the federal food stamp program.

(4) $48,000 of the
general fund‑‑state appropriation for fiscal year 2002 is provided
solely to implement chapter 111, Laws of 2001 (veterans/Philippines).

(5) The department
shall apply the provisions of RCW 74.04.005(10) to simplify resource
eligibility policy, make such policy consistent with other federal public
assistance programs, and achieve the budgetary savings assumed in this section.

(6) It is the intent
of the legislature that the department shall comply with federal requirements
to maintain aggregate funding for supplemental security income (SSI) state
supplemental payments. Up to $10,000,000 in existing funding for family
support payments to persons with developmental disabilities in the
developmental disabilities program shall be provided as SSI state supplemental
payments. Any subsequent increases in the family support program will be
provided as additional SSI state supplemental payments. The department will
adjust the base SSI state supplemental payments as needed for these increases.
Individuals receiving family support payments shall not become eligible for
medical assistance under RCW 74.09.510 solely because they receive the SSI
state supplemental payment. If the number of people receiving SSI state
supplemental payments does not allow for $10,000,000 in family support SSI
state supplemental payments, the department shall identify other programs where
existing payments can be made as SSI state supplemental payments to reach that
amount.

(7) In the event
that the cumulative expenditure pattern for this program indicates that fiscal
year appropriations are insufficient to cover program costs, the department
shall take necessary steps to reduce expenditures so that total program costs
will not exceed the annual appropriation authority. The department will notify
the fiscal committees of the legislature prior to taking such action.

Sec. 208. 2001 2nd sp.s. c 7 s 208
(uncodified) is amended to read as follows:

FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF
SOCIAL AND HEALTH SERVICES‑-ALCOHOL AND SUBSTANCE
ABUSE PROGRAM

General Fund‑-State
Appropriation (FY 2002).... $ ((38,047,000))

35,851,000

General Fund‑-State
Appropriation (FY 2003).... $ ((38,938,000))

31,288,000

General Fund‑-Federal
Appropriation............. $.................................. ((91,695,000))

91,556,000

General Fund‑-Private/Local
Appropriation...... $ 723,000

Public Safety and Education
Account‑-State

Appropriation.............................. $ ((13,733,000))

13,454,000

Violence Reduction and Drug
Enforcement Account‑-

State Appropriation........................ $ ((52,510,000))

53,720,000

TOTAL
APPROPRIATION................. $ ((235,646,000))

226,592,000

The appropriations in
this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations:

(1) (($1,610,000))
$810,000 of the general fund‑-state appropriation for fiscal year
2002 and $1,622,000 of the general fund‑-state appropriation for fiscal
year 2003 are provided solely for expansion of 35 drug and alcohol treatment
beds for persons committed under RCW 70.96A.140. Patients meeting the
commitment criteria of RCW 70.96A.140 but who voluntarily agree to treatment in
lieu of commitment shall also be eligible for treatment in these additional
treatment beds. The department shall develop specific placement criteria for
these expanded treatment beds to ensure that this new treatment capacity is
prioritized for persons incapacitated as a result of chemical dependency and
who are also high utilizers of hospital services. These additional treatment
beds shall be located in the eastern part of the state.

(2) (($2,800,000 of
the public safety and education account‑-state appropriation is provided
solely for expansion of treatment for persons gravely disabled by abuse and
addiction to alcohol and other drugs including methamphetamine.

(3))) $1,083,000 of the public safety and education
account‑-state appropriation ((is)) and $75,000 of the violence
reduction and drug enforcement account‑-state appropriation are
provided solely for adult and juvenile drug courts that have a net loss of
federal grant funding in state fiscal year 2002 and state fiscal year 2003.
This appropriation is intended to cover approximately one-half of lost federal
funding. It is the intent of the legislature to provide state assistance to
counties to cover a part of lost federal funding for drug courts for a maximum
of three years.

(((4))) (3)
$1,993,000 of the public safety and education account‑-state
appropriation and $951,000 of the general fund‑-federal appropriation are
provided solely for drug and alcohol treatment for SSI clients. The department
shall continue research and post-program evaluation of these clients to further
determine the post-treatment utilization of medical services and the service
effectiveness of consolidation.

(4) Within the
amounts appropriated in this section, funding is provided to implement Second
Substitute House Bill No. 2338 (drug offender sentencing).

Sec. 209. 2001 2nd sp.s. c 7 s 209
(uncodified) is amended to read as follows:

FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF
SOCIAL AND HEALTH SERVICES‑-MEDICAL ASSISTANCE PROGRAM

General Fund‑-State
Appropriation (FY 2002).... $ ((1,028,885,000))

1,072,697,000

General Fund‑-State
Appropriation (FY 2003).... $ ((1,130,904,000))

1,113,133,000

General Fund‑-Federal
Appropriation............. $.................................. ((3,637,511,000))

4,023,271,000

General Fund‑-Private/Local
Appropriation...... $ ((276,147,000))

222,272,000

Emergency Medical Services
and Trauma Care Systems

Trust Account‑-State
Appropriation......... $ 9,200,000

Health Services Account‑-State
Appropriation... $ ((1,043,310,000))

1,511,964,000

TOTAL APPROPRIATION................. $ ((7,125,957,000))

7,952,537,000

The appropriations in
this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations:

(1) The department
shall increase its efforts to restrain the growth of health care costs. The
appropriations in this section anticipate that the department implements a
combination of cost containment and utilization strategies sufficient to reduce
general fund‑-state costs by approximately 3 percent below the level
projected for the 2001-03 biennium in the March 2001 forecast plus an
additional $10,000,000. The department shall report to the fiscal
committees of the legislature by October 1, 2001, on its specific plans and
semiannual targets for accomplishing these savings. The department shall
report again to the fiscal committees by March 1, 2002, and by September 1,
2002, on actual performance relative to the semiannual targets. If
satisfactory progress is not being made to achieve the targeted savings, the
reports shall include recommendations for additional or alternative measures to
control costs.

(2) The department
shall continue to extend medicaid eligibility to children through age 18
residing in households with incomes below 200 percent of the federal poverty
level.

(3) In determining
financial eligibility for medicaid-funded services, the department is
authorized to disregard recoveries by Holocaust survivors of insurance proceeds
or other assets, as defined in RCW 48.104.030.

(4) $502,000 of the
health services account appropriation, $400,000 of the general fund‑-private/local
appropriation, and $1,676,000 of the general fund‑-federal appropriation
are provided solely for implementation of Second Substitute House Bill No. 1058
(breast and cervical cancer treatment). If the bill is not enacted by June 30,
2001, or if private funding is not contributed equivalent to the general fund‑-private/local
appropriation, the funds appropriated in this subsection shall lapse.

(5) $620,000 of the
health services account appropriation for fiscal year 2002, $1,380,000 of the
health services account appropriation for fiscal year 2003, and $2,000,000 of
the general fund‑-federal appropriation are provided solely for
implementation of a "ticket to work" medicaid buy-in program for
working persons with disabilities, operated in accordance with the following
conditions:

(a) To be eligible, a
working person with a disability must have total income which is less than 450
percent of poverty;

(b) Participants shall
participate in the cost of the program by paying (i) a monthly enrollment fee
equal to fifty percent of any unearned income in excess of the medicaid
medically needy standard; and (ii) a monthly premium equal to 5 percent of all
unearned income, plus 5 percent of all earned income after disregarding the
first sixty-five dollars of monthly earnings, and half the remainder;

(c) The department
shall establish more restrictive eligibility standards than specified in this
subsection to the extent necessary to operate the program within appropriated
funds;

(d) The department may
require point-of-service copayments as appropriate, except that copayments
shall not be so high as to discourage appropriate service utilization,
particularly of prescription drugs needed for the treatment of psychiatric
conditions; and

(e) The department
shall establish systems for tracking and reporting enrollment and expenditures
in this program, and the prior medical assistance eligibility status of new
program enrollees. The department shall additionally survey the prior and
current employment status and approximate hours worked of program enrollees,
and report the results to the fiscal and health care committees of the legislature
by January 15, 2003.

(6) From funds
appropriated in this section, the department shall design, implement, and
evaluate pilot projects to assist individuals with at least three different
diseases to improve their health, while reducing total medical expenditures.
The projects shall involve (a) identifying persons who are seriously or
chronically ill due to a combination of medical, social, and functional
problems; and (b) working with the individuals and their care providers to
improve adherence to state-of-the-art treatment regimens. The department shall
report to the health care and the fiscal committees of the legislature by
January 1, 2002, on the particular disease states, intervention protocols, and
delivery mechanisms it proposes to test.

(7) Sufficient funds
are appropriated in this section for the department to continue full-scope
dental coverage, vision coverage, and podiatry services for medicaid-eligible
adults.

(8) The legislature
reaffirms that it is in the state's interest for Harborview medical center to
remain an economically viable component of the state's health care system.

(9) $80,000 of the
general fund‑-state appropriation for fiscal year 2002, $80,000 of the
general fund‑-state appropriation for fiscal year 2003, and $160,000 of
the general fund‑-federal appropriation are provided solely for the
newborn referral program to provide access and outreach to reduce infant
mortality.

(10) $30,000 of the
general fund‑-state appropriation for fiscal year 2002, $31,000 of the
general fund‑-state appropriation for fiscal year 2003, and $62,000 of
the general fund‑-federal appropriation are provided solely for
implementation of Substitute Senate Bill No. 6020 (dental sealants). If Substitute
Senate Bill No. 6020 is not enacted by June 30, 2001, the amounts provided in
this subsection shall lapse.

(11) In accordance with
RCW 74.46.625, (($376,318,000)) $703,077,000 of the health
services account appropriation for fiscal year 2002, (($144,896,000)) $228,252,000
of the health services account appropriation for fiscal year 2003, and (($542,089,000))
$945,284,000 of the general fund‑-federal appropriation are
provided solely for supplemental payments to nursing homes operated by rural
public hospital districts, applicable to state fiscal years 2000, 2001,
2002, and 2003. The payments shall be conditioned upon (a) a contractual
commitment by the association of public hospital districts and participating
rural public hospital districts to make an intergovernmental transfer to the
state treasurer, for deposit into the health services account, equal to at
least 98 percent of the supplemental payments; and (b) a contractual commitment
by the participating districts to not allow expenditures covered by the
supplemental payments to be used for medicaid nursing home rate-setting. The
participating districts shall retain no more than a total of $20,000,000 for
the 2001-03 biennium.

(12) (($38,690,000))
$38,766,000 of the health services account appropriation for fiscal year
2002, (($40,189,000)) $40,488,000 of the health services account
appropriation for fiscal year 2003, and (($80,241,000)) $79,832,000
of the general fund‑-federal appropriation are provided solely for
additional disproportionate share and medicare upper payment limit payments to
public hospital districts.

(a) The payments shall
be conditioned upon a contractual commitment by the participating public
hospital districts to make an intergovernmental transfer to the health services
account equal to at least 91 percent of the additional payments. At least 28
percent of the amounts retained by the participating hospital districts shall
be allocated to the state's teaching hospitals.

(b) An additional 4.5
percent of the additional payments may be retained by the participating public
hospital districts contingent upon the receipt of $446,500,000 in newly
identified proshare reimbursement from the federal government over the 2001-03
biennium. If the actual amount received is less than $446,500,000, the amount
retained pursuant to this subsection (12)(b) shall be prorated accordingly.
The state teaching hospitals shall receive a distribution of the amount
retained by the participating hospital districts in this subsection (12)(b) as
allocated in (a) of this subsection.

(13) $412,000 of the
general fund‑‑state appropriation for fiscal year 2002, $862,000 of
the general fund‑‑state appropriation for fiscal year 2003, and
$730,000 of the general fund‑‑federal appropriation are provided
solely for implementation of Substitute House Bill No. 1162 (small rural
hospitals). If Substitute House Bill No. 1162 is not enacted by June 30, 2001,
the amounts provided in this subsection shall lapse.

(14) The department may
continue to use any federal money available to continue to provide medicaid
matching funds for funds contributed by local governments for purposes of
conducting eligibility outreach to children and underserved groups. The
department shall ensure cooperation with the anticipated audit of the school
districts' matchable expenditures for this program and advise the appropriate
legislative fiscal committees of the findings.

(15) The department
may transfer up to $11,000,000 of the general fund‑-state appropriation
for fiscal year 2003 from the medical assistance administration to the economic
services administration to implement reductions in the general
assistance-unemployable program.

(16) The department
shall coordinate with the health care authority and community and migrant
health clinics to actively assist children and immigrant adults not eligible
for medicaid to enroll in the basic health plan.

(17) Individuals who
transition from receiving family support payments through the developmental
disabilities division to SSI state supplemental payments shall not become
eligible for medical assistance under RCW 74.09.510 solely because they receive
the SSI state supplemental payment.

(18) Within
available resources, the department shall design and initiate a general
assistance medical care management project in two counties, one in eastern
Washington and one in western Washington. In designing the project, the
department shall consult with the mental health division, migrant and community
health centers, and any other managed care provider that has the capacity to
offer coordinated medical and mental health care. The projects shall be
designed in such a way that a designated provider network is established for
general assistance clients so that care management can be maximized. The department
shall report on the design of the pilot projects to the policy and fiscal
committees of the legislature by October 15, 2002.

(19) In the event
that the cumulative expenditure pattern for this program indicates that fiscal
year appropriations are insufficient to cover program costs, or that assumed
federal proshare revenue is not attainable, the department shall take necessary
steps to reduce expenditures so that total program costs will not exceed the
annual appropriation authority. The department will notify the fiscal
committees of the legislature prior to taking such action.

Sec. 210. 2001 2nd sp.s. c 7 s 210
(uncodified) is amended to read as follows:

FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF
SOCIAL AND HEALTH SERVICES‑-VOCATIONAL
REHABILITATION PROGRAM

General Fund‑-State
Appropriation (FY 2002).... $ ((11,309,000))

11,135,000

General Fund‑-State
Appropriation (FY 2003).... $ ((9,780,000))

9,221,000

General Fund‑-Federal
Appropriation............. $.................................. ((83,738,000))

82,235,000

General Fund‑-Private/Local
Appropriation...... $ 360,000

TOTAL
APPROPRIATION................. $ ((105,187,000))

102,951,000

The appropriations in
this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations: The
division of vocational rehabilitation shall negotiate cooperative interagency
agreements with state and local organizations to improve and expand employment
opportunities for people with severe disabilities.

Sec. 211. 2001 2nd sp.s. c 7 s 211
(uncodified) is amended to read as follows:

FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF
SOCIAL AND HEALTH SERVICES‑-ADMINISTRATION AND
SUPPORTING SERVICES PROGRAM

General Fund‑-State
Appropriation (FY 2002).... $ ((30,444,000))

30,419,000

General Fund‑-State
Appropriation (FY 2003).... $ ((29,369,000))

22,419,000

General Fund‑-Federal
Appropriation............. $.................................. ((50,562,000))

47,135,000

General Fund‑-Private/Local
Appropriation...... $ 810,000

TOTAL
APPROPRIATION................. $ ((111,185,000))

100,783,000

The appropriations in
this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations:

(1) By November 1,
2001, the secretary shall report to the fiscal committees of the legislature on
the actions the secretary has taken, or proposes to take, within current
funding levels to resolve the organizational problems identified in the
department's February 2001 report to the legislature on current systems for
billing third-party payers for services delivered by the state psychiatric
hospitals. The secretary is authorized to transfer funds from this section to
the mental health program to the extent necessary to achieve the organizational
improvements recommended in that report.

(2) By November 1,
2001, the department shall report to the fiscal committees of the legislature
with the least costly plan for assuring that billing and accounting technologies
in the state psychiatric hospitals adequately and efficiently comply with
standards set by third-party payers. The plan shall be developed with
participation by and oversight from the office of financial management, the
department's information systems services division, and the department of
information services.

(3) The department
shall reconstitute the payment integrity program to place greater emphasis upon
the prevention of future billing errors, ensure billing and administrative
errors are treated in a manner distinct from allegations of fraud and abuse,
and shall rename the program. In keeping with this revised focus, the
department shall also increase to one thousand dollars the cumulative total of
apparent billing errors allowed before a provider is contacted for repayment.

(4) By September 1,
2001, the department shall report to the fiscal committees of the legislature
results from the payment review program. The report shall include actual costs
recovered and estimated costs avoided for fiscal year 2001 and the costs
incurred by the department to administer the program. The report shall
document criteria and methodology used for determining avoided costs. In
addition, the department shall seek input from health care providers and consumer
organizations on modifications to the program. The department shall provide
annual updates to the report to the fiscal committees of the legislature by
September 1st of each year for the preceding fiscal year.

(5) Amounts provided
in this section are sufficient to implement Third Substitute House Bill No.
1517 (state agency quality improvement).

Sec. 212. 2001 2nd sp.s. c 7 s 213
(uncodified) is amended to read as follows:

FOR THE STATE HEALTH
CARE AUTHORITY

General Fund‑-State
Appropriation (FY 2002).... $ 6,655,000

((General Fund‑-State
Appropriation (FY 2003)... $........................................... 6,654,000))

State Health Care Authority
Administrative

Account‑-State
Appropriation............... $ ((20,091,000))

20,509,000

Health Services Account‑-State
Appropriation... $ ((499,148,000))

536,041,000

General Fund‑-Federal
Appropriation............. $.................................. ((3,611,000))

4,240,000

Medical Aid Account‑‑State
Appropriation........ $ 45,000

TOTAL
APPROPRIATION................. $ ((536,159,000))

567,490,000

The appropriations in
this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations:

(1) $6,551,000 of the
general fund‑-state appropriation for fiscal year 2002 and (($6,550,000))
$6,654,000 of the ((general fund)) health services account‑-state
appropriation ((for fiscal year 2003)) are provided solely for health
care services provided through local community clinics.

(2) Within funds
appropriated in this section and sections 205 and 206 of this 2001 act, the
health care authority shall continue to provide an enhanced basic health plan
subsidy option for foster parents licensed under chapter 74.15 RCW and workers
in state-funded home care programs. Under this enhanced subsidy option, foster
parents and home care workers with family incomes below 200 percent of the
federal poverty level shall be allowed to enroll in the basic health plan at a
cost of ten dollars per covered worker per month.

(3) The health care
authority shall require organizations and individuals which are paid to deliver
basic health plan services and which choose to sponsor enrollment in the
subsidized basic health plan to pay the following: (i) A minimum of fifteen
dollars per enrollee per month for persons below 100 percent of the federal
poverty level; and (ii) a minimum of twenty dollars per enrollee per month for
persons whose family income is 100 percent to 125 percent of the federal
poverty level.

(4) The health care
authority shall solicit information from the United States office of personnel
management, health plans, and other relevant sources, regarding the cost of
implementation of mental health parity by the federal employees health benefits
program in 2001. A progress report shall be provided to the senate and house
of representatives fiscal committees by July 1, 2002, and a final report shall
be provided to the legislature by November 15, 2002, on the study findings.

(5) $20,000,000 of
the health services account appropriation is provided solely for enrollment in
the subsidized basic health plan of persons who, solely by reason of their
immigration status, are not eligible for medicaid coverage of their nonemergent
medical care needs. Any entity or organization may sponsor subsidized basic
health plan enrollment for a person who, by reason of their immigration status,
is not eligible for medicaid coverage of their nonemergent medical care needs.

(6) The health care
authority shall report to the fiscal committees of the legislature on the
costs, benefits, and feasibility of implementing a system no later than January
1, 2004, under which the state's contribution to the cost of employee medical
coverage would be graduated according to employee salary. Under the graduated
system, employees in higher salary ranges would pay a larger share of the cost
of their medical coverage, while those paid lower salaries would pay a smaller
percentage of their premium. The report shall be prepared in consultation with
the department of personnel and the state-supported colleges and universities,
and shall be submitted to the fiscal committees no later than December 1, 2002.

(7) In consultation
with the department of personnel and with the state-supported colleges and
universities, the health care authority shall report to the fiscal committees
of the legislature by October 1, 2002, a plan for expanding the availability
and use of flexible spending account plans under which employees may set aside
pretax earnings to cover their out-of-pocket medical costs. The authority is
authorized to proceed with implementation of such a plan to the extent it can
be accomplished within existing state funding levels.

(8) $685,000 of the
health services account appropriation, $629,000 of the general fund‑-federal
appropriation, and the medical aid account appropriation are provided solely
for implementation of Substitute Senate Bill No. 6368 (prescription drug
utilization and education). If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2002, these
amounts shall lapse.

Sec. 213. 2001 2nd sp.s. c 7 s 214
(uncodified) is amended to read as follows:

FOR THE HUMAN RIGHTS COMMISSION

General Fund‑-State
Appropriation (FY 2002).... $ 2,688,000

General Fund‑-State
Appropriation (FY 2003).... $ ((2,700,000))

2,619,000

General Fund‑-Federal
Appropriation... ......... $.................................. 1,544,000

General Fund‑-Private/Local
Appropriation...... $ 100,000

TOTAL
APPROPRIATION................. $ ((7,032,000))

6,951,000

Sec. 214. 2001 2nd sp.s. c 7 s 215
(uncodified) is amended to read as follows:

FOR THE BOARD OF INDUSTRIAL
INSURANCE APPEALS

Worker and Community
Right-to-Know Account‑-State

Appropriation.............................. $ 20,000

Accident Account‑-State
Appropriation.......... $ ((14,692,000))

14,798,000

Medical Aid Account‑-State
Appropriation........ $...................................... ((14,694,000))

14,801,000

TOTAL
APPROPRIATION................. $ ((29,406,000))

29,619,000

Sec. 215. 2001 2nd sp.s. c 7 s 216
(uncodified) is amended to read as follows:

FOR THE CRIMINAL JUSTICE
TRAINING COMMISSION

Municipal Criminal Justice
Assistance Account‑-

Local Appropriation........................ $ 460,000

Death Investigations
Account‑-State

Appropriation.............................. $ 148,000

Public Safety and Education
Account‑-State

Appropriation.............................. $ ((18,439,000))

18,176,000

TOTAL
APPROPRIATION................. $ ((19,047,000))

18,784,000

The appropriations in
this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations:

(1) $124,000 of the
public safety and education account appropriation is provided solely to allow
the Washington association of sheriffs and police chiefs to increase the
technical and training support provided to the local criminal justice agencies
on the new incident-based reporting system and the national incident-based
reporting system.

(2) $136,000 of the
public safety and education account appropriation is provided solely to allow
the Washington association of prosecuting attorneys to enhance the training
provided to criminal justice personnel.

(3) (($22,000)) $20,000
of the public safety and education account appropriation is provided solely to
increase payment rates for the criminal justice training commission's
contracted food service provider.

(4) (($31,000)) $28,000
of the public safety and education account appropriation is provided solely to
increase payment rates for the criminal justice training commission's contract
with the Washington association of sheriffs and police chiefs.

(5) $65,000 of the
public safety and education account appropriation is provided solely for
regionalized training programs for school district and local law enforcement
officials on school safety issues.

(6) $233,000 of the
public safety and education account appropriation is provided solely for
training and equipping local law enforcement officers to respond to
methamphetamine crime.

(7) (($374,000 of
the public safety and education account appropriation is provided solely for
the implementation of House Bill No. 1062 (certification of peace officers).
If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2001, the amounts provided in this
subsection shall lapse.

(8))) $450,000 of the public safety and education
account appropriation is provided solely for grants to be distributed by the
Washington association of sheriffs and police chiefs for electronic mapping of
school facilities.

Sec. 216. 2001 2nd sp.s. c 7 s 217
(uncodified) is amended to read as follows:

FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF LABOR AND
INDUSTRIES

General Fund‑-State
Appropriation (FY 2002).... $ ((7,738,000))

5,577,000

General Fund‑-State
Appropriation (FY 2003).... $ ((7,682,000))

5,351,000

General Fund‑-Federal
Appropriation............. $.................................. 1,250,000

Public Safety and Education
Account‑-State

Appropriation.............................. $ ((19,862,000))

19,492,000

Public Safety and Education
Account‑-Federal

Appropriation.............................. $ 6,950,000

Public Safety and Education
Account‑-Private/Local

Appropriation.............................. $ 4,200,000

Asbestos Account‑-State
Appropriation. ........ $ 688,000

Electrical License Account‑-State

Appropriation.............................. $ 28,412,000

Farm Labor Revolving
Account‑-Private/Local

Appropriation.............................. $ 28,000

Worker and Community
Right-to-Know Account‑-State

Appropriation.............................. $ 2,281,000

Public Works Administration
Account‑-State

Appropriation.............................. $ 2,856,000

Accident Account‑-State
Appropriation.......... $ ((179,186,000))

184,219,000

Accident Account‑-Federal
Appropriation........ $ 11,568,000

Medical Aid Account‑-State
Appropriation........ $...................................... ((176,715,000))

178,366,000

Medical Aid Account‑-Federal
Appropriation..... $ 2,438,000

Plumbing Certificate
Account‑-State

Appropriation.............................. $ ((1,015,000))

1,111,000

Pressure Systems Safety
Account‑-State

Appropriation.............................. $ ((2,274,000))

2,525,000

TOTAL
APPROPRIATION................. $ ((455,143,000))

457,312,000

The appropriations in
this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations:

(1) Pursuant to RCW
7.68.015, the department shall operate the crime victims compensation program
within the public safety and education account funds appropriated in this
section. ((In the event that cost containment measures are necessary, the
department may (a) institute copayments for services; (b) develop preferred
provider contracts; or (c) other cost containment measures.)) Pursuant
to RCW 7.68.030, the department shall adopt rules as necessary to ensure
effective cost containment measures. These measures may include implementing
ratable reductions and establishing a priority order for implementing the
ratable reductions. Cost containment measures shall not include holding
invoices received in one fiscal period for payment from appropriations in subsequent
fiscal periods. No more than (($5,248,000)) $5,150,000 of the
public safety and education account appropriation shall be expended for
department administration of the crime victims compensation program.

(2) (($1,438,000 of
the accident account‑-state appropriation and $1,438,000 of the medical
aid account‑-state appropriation are provided for the one-time cost of
implementing a recent state supreme court ruling regarding the calculation of
workers' compensation benefits. This decision significantly increases the
complexity of calculating benefits and therefore increases the administrative
and legal costs of the workers' compensation program. The department shall
develop and report to appropriate committees of the legislature proposed
statutory language that provides greater certainty and simplicity in the
calculation of benefits. The report shall be submitted by October 1, 2001.

(3))) It is the intent of the legislature that
elevator inspection fees shall fully cover the cost of the elevator inspection
program. Pursuant to RCW 43.135.055, during the 2001-03 fiscal biennium the
department may increase fees in excess of the fiscal growth factor, if the
increases are necessary to fully fund the cost of the elevator inspection
program.

Sec. 217. 2001 2nd sp.s. c 7 s 218
(uncodified) is amended to read as follows:

FOR THE INDETERMINATE SENTENCE
REVIEW BOARD

General Fund‑-State
Appropriation (FY 2002).... $ 999,000

General Fund‑-State
Appropriation (FY 2003).... $ ((999,000))

969,000

TOTAL
APPROPRIATION................. $ ((1,998,000))

1,968,000

Sec. 218. 2001 2nd sp.s. c 7 s 219
(uncodified) is amended to read as follows:

FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF VETERANS
AFFAIRS

(1) HEADQUARTERS

General Fund‑-State
Appropriation (FY 2002).... $ ((1,529,000))

1,577,000

General Fund‑-State
Appropriation (FY 2003).... $ ((1,533,000))

1,536,000

Charitable, Educational,
Penal, and Reformatory

Institutions Account‑-State

Appropriation.............................. $ 7,000

TOTAL
APPROPRIATION................. $ ((3,069,000))

3,120,000

(2) FIELD SERVICES

General Fund‑-State
Appropriation (FY 2002).... $ 2,619,000

General Fund‑-State
Appropriation (FY 2003).... $ ((2,643,000))

2,583,000

General Fund‑-Federal
Appropriation............. $.................................. ((155,000))

310,000

General Fund‑-Private/Local
Appropriation...... $ 1,663,000

TOTAL
APPROPRIATION................. $ ((7,080,000))

7,175,000

(3) INSTITUTIONAL
SERVICES

General Fund‑-State
Appropriation (FY 2002).... $ ((6,832,000))

5,765,000

General Fund‑-State
Appropriation (FY 2003).... $ ((4,600,000))

5,537,000

General Fund‑-Federal
Appropriation............. $.................................. ((28,699,000))

27,437,000

General Fund‑-Private/Local
Appropriation...... $ ((25,614,000))

22,828,000

TOTAL
APPROPRIATION................. $ ((65,745,000))

61,567,000

The appropriations in
this subsection are subject to the following terms and conditions: (($3,664,000))
$2,886,000 of the general fund‑-federal appropriation and (($7,377,000))
$5,639,000 of the general fund‑-local appropriation are provided
solely for the department to acquire, establish, and operate a nursing facility
dedicated to serving men and women from Washington who have served in the
nation's armed forces.

Sec. 219. 2001 2nd sp.s. c 7 s 220
(uncodified) is amended to read as follows:

FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF HEALTH

General Fund‑-State
Appropriation (FY 2002).... $ ((65,308,000))

55,486,000

General Fund‑-State
Appropriation (FY 2003).... $ ((66,941,000))

54,760,000

Health Services Account‑-State
Appropriation... $ ((24,186,000))

37,859,000

General Fund‑-Federal
Appropriation............. $.................................. ((276,840,000))

296,992,000

General Fund‑-Private/Local
Appropriation...... $ ((81,526,000))

83,017,000

Hospital Commission Account‑-State

Appropriation.............................. $ ((1,718,000))

2,305,000

Health Professions Account‑-State

Appropriation.............................. $ ((38,456,000))

39,337,000

Emergency Medical Services
and Trauma Care Systems

Trust Account‑-State
Appropriation......... $ 14,858,000

Safe Drinking Water Account‑-State

Appropriation.............................. $ ((2,701,000))

2,689,000

Drinking Water Assistance
Account‑-Federal

Appropriation.............................. $ ((13,400,000))

13,376,000

Salmon Recovery Account‑‑State

Appropriation.............................. $ 182,000

Waterworks Operator
Certification‑-State

Appropriation.............................. $ 622,000

Water Quality Account‑-State
Appropriation..... $ ((3,328,000))

3,304,000

Accident Account‑-State
Appropriation.......... $ 257,000

Medical Aid Account‑-State
Appropriation........ $ 45,000

State Toxics Control
Account‑-State

Appropriation.............................. $ ((2,817,000))

2,809,000

Medical Test Site Licensure
Account‑-State

Appropriation.............................. $ ((1,369,000))

1,801,000

Youth Tobacco Prevention
Account‑-State

Appropriation.............................. $ 1,797,000

Tobacco Prevention and
Control Account‑-State

Appropriation.............................. $ ((34,992,000))

43,737,000

TOTAL
APPROPRIATION................. $ ((631,161,000))

655,233,000

The appropriations in
this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations:

(1) The department or
any successor agency is authorized to raise existing fees charged to the
drinking water operator certification, newborn screening, radioactive
materials, x-ray compliance, drinking water plan review, midwifery, hearing and
speech, veterinarians, psychologists, pharmacists, hospitals, podiatrists, ((and))
home health and home care, transient accommodations licensing, adult
residential rehabilitation facilities licensing, state institution licensing,
medical test site licensing, alcoholism treatment facilities licensing,
certificate of need, and food handlers programs, in excess of the fiscal
growth factor established by Initiative Measure No. 601, if necessary, to meet
the actual costs of conducting business and the appropriation levels in this
section.

(2) $339,000 of the
general fund‑-state appropriation for fiscal year 2002 ((and $339,000)),
$157,000 of the general fund‑-state appropriation for fiscal year
2003, and the salmon recovery account appropriation are provided solely
for technical assistance to local governments and special districts on water
conservation and reuse.

(3) $1,675,000 of the
general fund‑-state fiscal year 2002 appropriation and $1,676,000 of the
general fund‑-state fiscal year 2003 appropriation are provided solely
for the implementation of the Puget Sound water work plan and agency action
items, DOH-01, DOH-02, DOH-03, and DOH-04.

(4) The department of
health shall not initiate any services that will require expenditure of state
general fund moneys unless expressly authorized in this act or other law. The
department may seek, receive, and spend, under RCW 43.79.260 through 43.79.282,
federal moneys not anticipated in this act as long as the federal funding does
not require expenditure of state moneys for the program in excess of amounts
anticipated in this act. If the department receives unanticipated unrestricted
federal moneys, those moneys shall be spent for services authorized in this act
or in any other legislation that provides appropriation authority, and an equal
amount of appropriated state moneys shall lapse. Upon the lapsing of any
moneys under this subsection, the office of financial management shall notify
the legislative fiscal committees. As used in this subsection,
"unrestricted federal moneys" includes block grants and other funds
that federal law does not require to be spent on specifically defined projects
or matched on a formula basis by state funds.

(5) (($5,779,000))
$19,778,000 of the health services account‑-state appropriation ((for
fiscal year 2002 and $4,665,000 of the health services account‑-state
appropriation for fiscal year 2003 are)) is provided solely for ((purchase
and distribution of the pneumococcal conjugate vaccine as part of)) the
state's program of universal access to essential childhood vaccines.

(6) $85,000 of the
general fund‑-state appropriation for fiscal year 2002 and $65,000 of the
general fund‑-state appropriation for fiscal year 2003 are provided
solely for the implementation of Substitute House Bill No. 1365 (infant and
child products). If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2001, the amounts
provided in this subsection shall lapse.

(7) $58,000 of the
general fund‑-state appropriation for fiscal year 2002 and $25,000 of the
general fund‑-state appropriation for fiscal year 2003 are provided
solely for the implementation of Second Substitute House Bill No. 1590
(breastfeeding). If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2001, the amounts
provided in this subsection shall lapse.

(8) From funds
appropriated in this section, the state board of health shall convene a
broadly-based task force to review the available information on the potential
risks and benefits to public and personal health and safety, and to individual
privacy, of emerging technologies involving human deoxyribonucleic acid (DNA).
The board may reimburse task force members for travel expenses according to RCW
43.03.220. The task force shall consider information provided to it by
interested persons on: (a) The incidence of discriminatory actions based upon
genetic information; (b) strategies to safeguard civil rights and privacy
related to genetic information; (c) remedies to compensate individuals for
inappropriate use of their genetic information; and (d) incentives for further
research and development on the use of DNA to promote public health, safety,
and welfare. The task force shall report on its findings and any
recommendations to appropriate committees of the legislature by October 1,
2002.

(9) $533,000 of the
general fund‑‑state appropriation for fiscal year 2002 and (($1,067,000))
$847,000 of the general fund‑‑state appropriation for fiscal
year 2003 are provided solely for performance-based contracts with local
jurisdictions to assure the safety of drinking water provided by small
"group B" water systems.

(10) By October 1,
2002, the department shall adopt rules and establish mechanisms under which the
state's contribution to the cost of care for recipients of HIV early
intervention services whose incomes are above 125 percent of the federal
poverty level shall be adjusted on a sliding scale basis. The rules shall
provide for the percentage of costs for which the state is responsible to
decrease according to the recipient's income, and shall further provide for an
annual limit on out-of-pocket expenditures for recipients at each income range.

Sec. 220. 2001 2nd sp.s. c 7 s 221
(uncodified) is amended to read as follows:

FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF
CORRECTIONS

The appropriations
to the department of corrections in chapter 7, Laws of 2001 2nd sp. sess., as
amended, shall be expended for the programs and in the amounts specified
therein. However, after April 1, 2002, unless specifically prohibited by this
act, the department may transfer general fund‑-state appropriations for
fiscal year 2002 that are not provided solely for a specified purpose, between
programs after approval by the director of financial management. The director
of the office of financial management shall notify the appropriate fiscal
committees of the senate and house of representatives in writing prior to
approving any deviations from appropriation levels.

(1) ADMINISTRATION AND
SUPPORT SERVICES

General Fund‑-State
Appropriation (FY 2002).... $ ((36,156,000))

36,786,000

General Fund‑-State
Appropriation (FY 2003).... $ ((36,365,000))

36,212,000

Public Safety and Education
Account‑-State

Appropriation.............................. $ ((1,576,000))

1,547,000

Violence Reduction and Drug
Enforcement

Account Appropriation.............. ........ $ 3,254,000

TOTAL
APPROPRIATION................. $ ((77,351,000))

77,799,000

The appropriations in
this subsection are subject to the following conditions and limitations:
$4,623,000 of the general fund‑-state appropriation for fiscal year 2002,
$4,623,000 of the general fund‑-state appropriation for fiscal year 2003,
and $3,254,000 of the violence reduction and drug enforcement account
appropriation are provided solely for the replacement of the department's
offender-based tracking system. This amount is conditioned on the department
satisfying the requirements of section 902 of this act. The department shall
prepare an assessment of the fiscal impact of any changes to the replacement
project. The assessment shall:

(a) Include a
description of any changes to the replacement project;

(b) Provide the
estimated costs for each component in the 2001-03 and subsequent biennia;

(c) Include a schedule
that provides the time estimated to complete changes to each component of the
replacement project; and

(d) Be provided to the
office of financial management, the department of information services, the
information services board, and the staff of the fiscal committees of the
senate and the house of representatives no later than November 1, 2002.

(2) CORRECTIONAL OPERATIONS

General Fund‑-State
Appropriation (FY 2002).... $ ((397,231,000))

404,390,000

General Fund‑-State
Appropriation (FY 2003).... $ ((407,078,000))

412,556,000

General Fund‑-Federal
Appropriation............. $.................................. ((12,096,000))

9,142,000

Violence Reduction and Drug
Enforcement Account‑-

State Appropriation........................ $ 1,614,000

Public Health Services
Account Appropriation... $ 1,453,000

TOTAL
APPROPRIATION................. $ ((819,472,000))

829,155,000

The appropriations in
this subsection are subject to the following conditions and limitations:

(a) The department may
expend funds generated by contractual agreements entered into for mitigation of
severe overcrowding in local jails. Any funds generated in excess of actual
costs shall be deposited in the state general fund. Expenditures shall not
exceed revenue generated by such agreements and shall be treated as recovery of
costs.

(b) The department
shall provide funding for the pet partnership program at the Washington
corrections center for women at a level at least equal to that provided in the
1995-97 biennium.

(c) The department of
corrections shall accomplish personnel reductions with the least possible
impact on correctional custody staff, community custody staff, and correctional
industries. For the purposes of this subsection, correctional custody staff
means employees responsible for the direct supervision of offenders.

(d) $553,000 of the
general fund‑-state appropriation for fiscal year 2002 and (($1,171,000))
$976,000 of the general fund‑-state appropriation for fiscal year
2003 are provided solely to increase payment rates for contracted education
providers, contracted chemical dependency providers, and contracted work
release facilities.

(e) During the 2001-03
biennium, when contracts are established or renewed for offender pay phone and
other telephone services provided to inmates, the department shall select the
contractor or contractors primarily based on the following factors: (i) The
lowest rate charged to both the inmate and the person paying for the telephone
call; and (ii) the lowest commission rates paid to the department, while
providing reasonable compensation to cover the costs of the department to
provide the telephone services to inmates and provide sufficient revenues for
the activities funded from the institutional welfare betterment account as of
January 1, 2000.

(f) For the acquisition
of properties and facilities, the department of corrections is authorized to
enter into financial contracts, paid for from operating resources, for the
purposes indicated and in not more than the principal amounts indicated, plus
financing expenses and required reserves pursuant to chapter 39.94 RCW. This
authority applies to the following: Lease-develop with the option to purchase
or lease-purchase approximately 50 work release beds in facilities throughout
the state for $3,500,000.

(g) $22,000 of the
general fund‑-state appropriation for fiscal year 2002 and $76,000 of the
general fund‑-state appropriation for fiscal year 2003 are provided
solely for the implementation of Second Substitute Senate Bill No. 6151 (high
risk sex offenders in the civil commitment and criminal justice systems). If
the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2001, the amounts provided in this
subsection shall lapse.

(h) ((The department
may acquire a ferry for no more than $1,000,000 from Washington state ferries.
Funds expended for this purpose will be recovered from the sale of marine
assets.)) $53,000 of the general fund‑-state appropriation for
fiscal year 2003 is provided solely for the implementation of either Second
Substitute House Bill No. 2507 or Engrossed Second Substitute Senate Bill No.
6490 (motor vehicle theft). If neither bill is enacted by June 30, 2002, the
amount provided in this subsection shall lapse.

(3) COMMUNITY
SUPERVISION

General Fund‑-State
Appropriation (FY 2002).... $ ((61,427,000))

68,097,000

General Fund‑-State
Appropriation (FY 2003).... $ ((62,934,000))

70,545,000

General Fund‑‑Federal
Appropriation............. $.................................. ((1,125,000))

870,000

Public Safety and Education

Account‑-State
Appropriation............... $ ((15,841,000))

15,546,000

TOTAL
APPROPRIATION................. $ ((141,327,000))

155,058,000

The appropriations in
this subsection are subject to the following conditions and limitations:

(a) The department of
corrections shall accomplish personnel reductions with the least possible
impact on correctional custody staff, community custody staff, and correctional
industries. For the purposes of this subsection, correctional custody staff
means employees responsible for the direct supervision of offenders.

(b) $75,000 of the
general fund‑-state appropriation for fiscal year 2002 and $75,000 of the
general fund‑-state appropriation for fiscal year 2003 are provided
solely for the department of corrections to contract with the institute for
public policy for responsibilities assigned in chapter 196, Laws of 1999
(offender accountability act) and sections 7 through 12 of chapter 197, Laws of
1999 (drug offender sentencing).

(c) $16,000 of the
general fund‑-state appropriation for fiscal year 2002 and (($34,000))
$29,000 of the general fund‑-state appropriation for fiscal year
2003 are provided solely to increase payment rates for contracted chemical
dependency providers.

(d) $30,000 of the
general fund‑-state appropriation for fiscal year 2002 and $30,000 of the
general fund‑-state appropriation for fiscal year 2003 are provided
solely for the implementation of Substitute Senate Bill No. 5118 (interstate
compact for adult offender supervision). If the bill is not enacted by June
30, 2001, the amounts provided in this subsection shall lapse.

(4) CORRECTIONAL
INDUSTRIES

General Fund‑-State
Appropriation (FY 2002).... $ 631,000

General Fund‑-State
Appropriation (FY 2003).... $ 629,000

TOTAL
APPROPRIATION................. $ 1,260,000

The appropriations in
this subsection are subject to the following conditions and limitations:
$110,000 of the general fund‑-state appropriation for fiscal year 2002
and $110,000 of the general fund‑-state appropriation for fiscal year
2003 are provided solely for transfer to the jail industries board. The board
shall use the amounts provided only for administrative expenses, equipment
purchases, and technical assistance associated with advising cities and
counties in developing, promoting, and implementing consistent, safe, and
efficient offender work programs.

(5) INTERAGENCY
PAYMENTS

General Fund‑-State
Appropriation (FY 2002).... $ 18,568,000

General Fund‑-State
Appropriation (FY 2003).... $ 18,569,000

TOTAL
APPROPRIATION................. $ 37,137,000

Sec. 221. 2001 2nd sp.s. c 7 s 222
(uncodified) is amended to read as follows:

FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF SERVICES
FOR THE BLIND

General Fund‑-State
Appropriation (FY 2002).... $ 1,693,000

General Fund‑-State
Appropriation (FY 2003).... $ ((1,628,000))

1,579,000

General Fund‑-Federal
Appropriation............. $.................................. ((11,140,000))

12,643,000

General Fund‑-Private/Local
Appropriation...... $ 80,000

TOTAL
APPROPRIATION................. $ ((14,541,000))

15,995,000

The appropriations in
this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations: $50,000
of the general fund‑-state appropriation for fiscal year 2002 and $50,000
of the general fund‑-state appropriation for fiscal year 2003 are
provided solely to increase state assistance for a comprehensive program of
training and support services for persons who are both deaf and blind.

Sec. 222. 2001 2nd sp.s. c 7 s 223
(uncodified) is amended to read as follows:

FOR THE SENTENCING GUIDELINES
COMMISSION

General Fund‑-State
Appropriation (FY 2002).... $ 936,000

General Fund‑-State
Appropriation (FY 2003).... $ ((857,000))

831,000

TOTAL
APPROPRIATION................. $ ((1,793,000))

1,767,000

The appropriations in
this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations:

$78,000 of the general
fund‑-state appropriation for fiscal year 2002 is provided solely for the
sentencing guidelines commission to conduct a comprehensive review and
evaluation of state sentencing policy. The review and evaluation shall include
an analysis of whether current sentencing ranges and standards, as well as
existing mandatory minimum sentences, existing sentence enhancements, and
special sentencing alternatives, are consistent with the purposes of the
sentencing reform act as set out in RCW 9.94A.010, including the intent of the
legislature to emphasize confinement for the violent offender and alternatives
to confinement for the nonviolent offender. The review and evaluation shall
also examine whether current sentencing ranges and standards are consistent
with existing corrections capacity.

The review and
evaluation shall consider studies on the cost-effectiveness of sentencing
alternatives, as well as the fiscal impact of sentencing policies on state and
local government. In conducting the review and evaluation, the commission
shall consult with the superior court judges' association, the Washington
association of prosecuting attorneys, the Washington defenders' association,
the Washington association of criminal defense lawyers, the Washington
association of sheriffs and police chiefs, organizations representing crime
victims, and other organizations and individuals with expertise and interest in
sentencing policy.

Not later than December
1, 2001, the commission shall present to the appropriate standing committees of
the legislature the report of its comprehensive review and evaluation, together
with any recommendations for revisions and modifications to state sentencing
policy, including sentencing ranges and standards, mandatory minimum sentences,
and sentence enhancements. If implementation of the recommendations of the
commission would result in exceeding the capacity of correctional facilities,
the commission shall at the same time present to the legislature a list of
revised standard sentence ranges which are consistent with currently authorized
rated and operational corrections capacity, and consistent with the purposes of
the sentencing reform act.

Sec. 223. 2001 2nd sp.s. c 7 s 224
(uncodified) is amended to read as follows:

FOR THE EMPLOYMENT SECURITY
DEPARTMENT

General Fund‑-Federal
Appropriation............. $.................................. 180,628,000

General Fund‑-Private/Local
Appropriation...... $ 30,119,000

Unemployment Compensation
Administration Account‑-

Federal Appropriation.............. ........ $ ((181,677,000))

194,167,000

Administrative Contingency
Account‑-State

Appropriation.............................. $ ((13,914,000))

16,534,000

Employment Service
Administrative Account‑-State

Appropriation.............................. $ 20,001,000

TOTAL
APPROPRIATION................. $ ((426,339,000))

441,449,000

The appropriations
in this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations:

(1) $133,000 of the
unemployment compensation administration account is provided solely for the
implementation of Substitute House Bill No. 2604 (unemployment compensation).
If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2002, the amount provided in this
subsection shall lapse.

(2) $156,000 of the
unemployment compensation administration account is provided solely for the
implementation of Substitute House Bill No. 2355 (unemployment insurance). If
the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2002, the amount provided in this
subsection shall lapse.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
224. A new section is added
to 2001 2nd sp.s. c 7 (uncodified) to read as follows:

FOR THE HOME CARE QUALITY
AUTHORITY

General Fund‑-State
Appropriation (FY 2003)......... $ 152,000

(End
of part)

PART
III

NATURAL RESOURCES

Sec. 301. 2001 2nd sp.s. c 7 s 302
(uncodified) is amended to read as follows:

FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF
ECOLOGY

General Fund‑-State
Appropriation (FY 2002).... $ ((46,633,000))

39,373,000

General Fund‑-State
Appropriation (FY 2003).... $ ((44,481,000))

33,890,000

General Fund‑-Federal
Appropriation............. $.................................. 56,805,000

General Fund‑-Private/Local
Appropriation...... $ 4,351,000

Special Grass Seed Burning
Research Account‑-

State Appropriation........................ $ 14,000

Reclamation Revolving
Account‑-State

Appropriation.............................. $ ((1,810,000))

1,935,000

Flood Control Assistance
Account‑-

State Appropriation........................ $ 4,098,000

State Emergency Water
Projects Revolving Account‑-

State Appropriation........................ $ 878,000

Waste
Reduction/Recycling/Litter Control Account‑-

State Appropriation........................ $ ((13,537,000))

14,287,000

State Drought Preparedness
Account‑-State

Appropriation.............................. $ ((5,325,000))

2,575,000

Salmon Recovery Account‑-State
Appropriation... $ 250,000

State and Local
Improvements Revolving Account

(Water Supply
Facilities)‑-State

Appropriation.............................. $ 587,000

Water Quality Account‑-State
Appropriation..... $ ((12,481,000))

22,335,000

Wood Stove Education and
Enforcement Account‑-

State Appropriation........................ $ 353,000

Worker and Community
Right-to-Know Account‑-

State Appropriation........................ $ 3,288,000

State Toxics Control
Account‑-State

Appropriation.............................. $ ((68,931,000))

70,763,000

State Toxics Control
Account‑-Private/Local

Appropriation.............................. $ 350,000

Local Toxics Control
Account‑-State

Appropriation.............................. $ 4,751,000

Water Quality Permit
Account‑-State

Appropriation.............................. $ ((23,827,000))

24,210,000

Underground Storage Tank
Account‑-State

Appropriation.............................. $ 2,682,000

Environmental Excellence
Account‑-State

Appropriation.............................. $ 504,000

Biosolids Permit Account‑-State
Appropriation... $........................................... ((589,000))

764,000

Hazardous Waste Assistance
Account‑-State

Appropriation.............................. $ 4,308,000

Air Pollution Control
Account‑-State

Appropriation.............................. $ ((1,066,000))

1,366,000

Oil Spill Prevention
Account‑-State

Appropriation.............................. $ ((7,921,000))

8,621,000

Air Operating Permit
Account‑-State

Appropriation................. ............ $ 3,608,000

Freshwater Aquatic Weeds
Account‑-State

Appropriation.............................. $ 1,898,000

Oil Spill Response Account‑-State

Appropriation.............................. $ 7,078,000

Metals Mining Account‑-State
Appropriation..... $ 5,000

Water Pollution Control
Revolving Account‑-

State Appropriation........................ $ ((467,000))

638,000

Water Pollution Control
Revolving Account‑-

Federal Appropriation...................... $ ((2,316,000))

2,728,000

TOTAL
APPROPRIATION................. $ ((324,942,000))

319,293,000

The appropriations in
this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations:

(1) $3,874,000 of the
general fund‑-state appropriation for fiscal year 2002, $3,874,000 of the
general fund‑-state appropriation for fiscal year 2003, $394,000 of the
general fund‑-federal appropriation, $2,070,000 of the oil spill
prevention account‑-state appropriation, and $3,686,000 of the water
quality permit account‑-state appropriation are provided solely for the
implementation of the Puget Sound work plan and agency action items DOE-01,
DOE-02, DOE-03, DOE-05, DOE-06, DOE‑07, DOE-08, and DOE-09.

(2) $500,000 of the
state toxics control account appropriation is provided for an assessment of the
financial assurance requirements of hazardous waste management facilities. By
September 30, 2002, the department shall provide to the governor and
appropriate committees of the legislature a report that: (a) Evaluates current
statutes and regulations governing hazardous waste management facilities; (b)
analyzes and makes recommendations for improving financial assurance regulatory
control; and (c) makes recommendations for funding financial assurance
regulatory control of hazardous waste management facilities.

(3) (($250,000 of
the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal year 2002, $250,000 of the
general fund--state appropriation for fiscal year 2003, $564,000)) $814,000
of the state drought preparedness account‑‑state appropriation, ((and))
$549,000 of the water quality account‑-state appropriation, and
$250,000 of the salmon recovery account‑-state appropriation are
provided solely for enhanced streamflow monitoring in critical salmon recovery
basins. $640,000 of this amount is provided solely to implement the Puget
Sound work plan and agency action item DOE-01.

(4) $1,000,000 of the
state toxics control account appropriation in this section is provided solely
for the department to work in cooperation with local jurisdictions to address
emerging storm water management requirements. This work shall include developing
a storm water manual for eastern Washington, technical assistance to local
jurisdictions, and increased implementation of the department's existing storm
water program. $200,000 of this amount is provided solely for implementation
of the Puget Sound work plan and agency action item DOE-06.

(5) $383,000 of the
general fund‑-state appropriation for fiscal year 2002 and $383,000 of
the general fund‑-state appropriation for fiscal year 2003 are provided
solely for water conservation plan review, technical assistance, and project
review for water conservation and reuse projects. By December 1, 2003, the
department in cooperation with the department of health shall report to the
governor and appropriate committees of the legislature on the activities and
achievements related to water conservation and reuse during the past two
biennia. The report shall include an overview of technical assistance
provided, reuse project development activities, and water conservation
achievements.

(6) $3,424,000 of the
state toxics control account appropriation is provided solely for
methamphetamine lab clean up activities.

(7)(a) $800,000
of the state toxics control account appropriation is provided solely to
implement the department's persistent, bioaccumulative toxic chemical
strategy. (($54,000 of this amount shall be allocated to the department of
health to assist with this effort.))

(b) In developing
its persistent bioaccumulative toxic chemical strategy, the department must:

(i) First develop a
planned strategy for the elimination of mercury from the environment. This
strategy will be known as the mercury chemical action plan. The development of
the mercury chemical action plan will be a model for developing all future
chemical action plans;

(ii) Develop a mercury
chemical action plan that includes, but is not limited to: (A) Identifying
current mercury uses in Washington; (B) analyzing current state and federal
laws, regulations, rules, and voluntary measures that can be used to reduce or
eliminate mercury; (C) identifying mercury reduction and elimination options;
and (D) implementing actions to reduce or eliminate mercury uses and releases;

(iii) Involve an
advisory committee of up to twelve members composed of adequate and balanced
representation of local government, business, agriculture, and environmental,
public health, and community groups in the development of the mercury chemical
action plan. In addition, the department must invite and strongly encourage
any interested tribes or federal agencies to participate in the advisory
committee process. The advisory committee must be involved in the development
of the mercury chemical action plan. All information that will serve as the
basis for any decisions in the mercury chemical action plan's development must
be available to the advisory committee members. The advisory committee has
sixty days to provide input to the department on the elements of the mercury
chemical action plan. The comments and suggestions made by the advisory
committee must be considered by the department; however, consensus of the
advisory committee is not necessary for the department to move forward in the
development of the mercury chemical action plan. All meetings of the advisory
committee are subject to the provisions of chapter 42.30 RCW. The advisory
committee for the mercury chemical action plan must be established by April 15,
2002;

(iv) By June 30,
2002, develop and issue a draft mercury chemical action plan in consultation
with the advisory committee. Following the release of the draft plan, the
department must allow for a sixty-day public comment period. The advisory
committee, following the comment period, shall consider the public comments
received; and

(v) The department
shall finalize the mercury chemical action plan by December 1, 2002. The final
mercury chemical action plan, developed after considering the public comments
and the input of the advisory committee, must outline actions for the
department to take, including, but not limited to, the development of any rules
and recommending any legislation. Implementation must begin no later than
January 1, 2003.

(8) Up to $11,365,000
of the state toxics control account appropriation is provided for the
remediation of contaminated sites. Of this amount, up to $2,000,000 may be
used to pay existing site remediation liabilities owed to the federal
environmental protection agency for clean-up work that has been completed. The
department shall carefully monitor actual revenue collections into the state
toxics control account, and is authorized to limit actual expenditures of the
appropriation provided in this section consistent with available revenue.

(9) $200,000 of the
state toxics control account appropriation is provided to assess the
effectiveness of the state's current toxic pollution prevention and dangerous
waste programs and policies. The department shall work with affected
stakeholder groups and the public to evaluate the performance of existing
programs, and identify feasible methods of reducing the generation of these
wastes. The department shall report its findings to the governor and the
appropriate committees of the legislature by September 30, 2002.

(10) $1,200,000 of the
state toxics control account appropriation is provided solely for the
department, in conjunction with affected local governments, to address emergent
areawide soil contamination problems. The department's efforts will include
public involvement processes and completing assessments of the geographical
extent of toxic contamination including highly contaminated areas.

(11) $170,000 of the
oil spill prevention account appropriation is provided solely for
implementation of the Puget Sound work plan action item UW-02 through a
contract with the University of Washington's sea grant program to develop an
educational program targeted to small spills from commercial fishing vessels,
ferries, cruise ships, ports, and marinas.

(12) $1,500,000 of the
general fund‑-state appropriation for fiscal year 2002, $1,500,000 of the
general fund‑-state appropriation for fiscal year 2003, and $3,000,000 of
the water quality account appropriation are provided solely to implement
chapter 237, Laws of 2001 (Engrossed Substitute House Bill No. 1832, water
resources management) and to support the processing of applications for changes
and transfers of existing water rights.

(13) (($4,500,000 of
the general fund‑-state appropriation for fiscal year 2002 and $4,500,000
of the general fund‑-state appropriation for fiscal year 2003 are)) $9,000,000
of the water quality account‑-state appropriation is provided solely
for grants to local governments and for technical assistance to conduct
watershed planning. Of the total amount, at least $7,000,000 must be
provided solely for grants to local governments.

(14) $3,114,000 of the
water quality account appropriation is provided solely to implement Engrossed
Substitute House Bill No. 1832 (water resources management). Of this amount:
(a) $2,100,000 is provided for grants to local governments for targeted
watershed assessments consistent with Engrossed Substitute House Bill No. 1832;
and (b) the remainder of the funding is provided solely for development of a
state environmental policy act template to streamline environmental review, creation
of a blue ribbon panel to develop long-term watershed planning implementation
funding options, and technical assistance.

(((18))) (15)
$200,000 of the water quality account appropriation is provided solely to
provide coordination and assistance to groups established for the purpose of
protecting, enhancing, and restoring the biological, chemical, and physical
processes of watersheds. These groups may include those involved in
coordinated resource management, regional fisheries enhancement groups,
conservation districts, watershed councils, and private nonprofit organizations
incorporated under Title 24 RCW.

(((19))) (16)
$325,000 of the state drought preparedness account‑-state appropriation
is provided solely for an environmental impact statement of the Pine Hollow
reservoir project to be conducted in conjunction with the local irrigation
district.

(((20) $1,700,000))
(17) $1,352,000 of the general fund‑-state appropriation for
fiscal year 2002, $700,000 of the state toxics control account‑-appropriation,
and (($280,000)) $980,000 of the oil spill prevention account
appropriation are provided solely for oil spill prevention measures in Puget
Sound. Of these amounts:

(a) The general fund
appropriation ((is)), $700,000 of the state toxics control account
appropriation, and $700,000 of the oil spill prevention account appropriation
are provided solely for the department of ecology to provide for charter
safety tug services((. Safety tug services shall include: (i))),
including the placement of a dedicated tug at Neah Bay for not less than
200 days in fiscal year 2002((; and (ii) other safety tug services that may
be released by the department at the request of the United States coast guard
captain of the port for Puget Sound to the areas or incidents that the
department deems to be of highest concern)) and fiscal year 2003.
By January 10, 2002, the department shall report to the appropriate committees
of the legislature regarding the number of dispatches, response time and
distance, and other factors pertaining to the safety tug services. The general
fund‑-state appropriation in this subsection is provided solely for
implementation of the Puget Sound work plan and agency action item DOE-09;

(b) $100,000 of the oil
spill prevention account appropriation is provided solely for the department to
conduct a vessel transponder feasibility study for Washington waters and
undertake a trial vessel tracking program using transponders. In conducting
the feasibility study and trial program, the department of ecology shall
consult with state pilotage authorities, the maritime industry and the United
States coast guard; and

(c) $180,000 of the oil
spill prevention account appropriation is provided solely to acquire vessel
incident reporting information.

The governor shall
request the federal government to provide ongoing resources to station a
dedicated rescue tug at Neah Bay.

(((21))) (18)
$600,000 of the water quality account‑‑state appropriation is
provided solely for setting instream flows in six basins not currently planning
under the watershed planning act.

(19) $500,000 of the
general fund‑-state appropriation for fiscal year 2003 and $250,000 of
the water quality account‑-state appropriation are provided solely to
implement House Bill No. 2993 (water policy). If the bill is not enacted by
June 30, 2002, the amount provided in this subsection shall lapse.

(20) For applicants
that meet eligibility requirements, the department of ecology shall consider
individual storm drain treatment systems to be classified as
"activity" projects and eligible for grant funding provided under
section 319 of the federal Clean Water Act. These projects shall be
prioritized for funding along with other grant proposals. Receipt of funding
shall be based on this prioritization.

Sec. 302. 2001 2nd sp.s. c 7 s 303
(uncodified) is amended to read as follows:

FOR THE STATE PARKS AND
RECREATION COMMISSION

General Fund‑-State
Appropriation (FY 2002).... $ ((32,298,000))

32,198,000

General Fund‑-State
Appropriation (FY 2003).... $ ((32,866,000))

30,080,000

General Fund‑-Federal
Appropriation............. $.................................. 2,690,000

General Fund‑-Private/Local
Appropriation...... $ 60,000

Winter Recreation Program
Account‑-State

Appropriation.............................. $ ((787,000))

1,087,000

Off Road Vehicle Account‑-State
Appropriation... $ 274,000

Snowmobile Account‑-State
Appropriation........ $ 4,682,000

Aquatic Lands Enhancement
Account‑-State

Appropriation.............................. $ 337,000

Public Safety and Education
Account‑-State

Appropriation.............................. $ ((48,000))

46,000

Salmon Recovery Account‑-State

Appropriation.............................. $ $200,000

Water Trail Program Account‑-State

Appropriation.......................... ... $ 24,000

Parks Renewal and
Stewardship Account‑-

State Appropriation........................ $ ((26,420,000))

29,693,000

TOTAL
APPROPRIATION................. $ ((100,486,000))

101,371,000

The appropriations in
this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations:

(1) Fees approved by
the state parks and recreation commission in the 2001-03 biennium
are authorized to exceed the fiscal growth factor under RCW 43.135.055.

(2) The state parks and
recreation commission, in collaboration with the office of financial management
and legislative staff, shall develop a cost-effective and readily accessible
approach for reporting revenues and expenditures at each state park. The
reporting system shall be complete and operational by December 1, 2001.

(3) ((The
appropriation in this section from the off-road vehicle account‑‑state
is provided under RCW 46.09.170(1)(c) and is provided solely to bring off-road
vehicle recreation facilities into compliance with the requirements,
guidelines, spirit, and intent of the federal Americans with disabilities act.

(4))) $79,000 of the general fund‑-state
appropriation for fiscal year 2002, $79,000 of the general fund‑-state
appropriation for fiscal year 2003, and $8,000 of the winter recreation program
account‑‑state appropriation are provided solely for a grant for
the operation of the Northwest avalanche center.

(((5))) (4)
$432,000 of the parks renewal and stewardship account appropriation is provided
for the operation of the Silver Lake visitor center. If a long-term management
agreement is not reached with the U.S. forest service by September 30, 2001,
the amount provided in this subsection shall lapse.

(((6))) (5)
$189,000 of the aquatic lands enhancement account appropriation is provided
solely for the implementation of the Puget Sound work plan and agency action
item P+RC-02.

Sec. 303. 2001 2nd sp.s. c 7 s 304
(uncodified) is amended to read as follows:

FOR THE INTERAGENCY
COMMITTEE FOR OUTDOOR RECREATION

General Fund‑-State
Appropriation (FY 2002)......... $ ((393,000))

143,000

General Fund‑-State
Appropriation (FY 2003)......... $ ((395,000))

145,000

General Fund‑-Federal
Appropriation.................. $.................................. 8,358,000

Firearms Range Account‑-State
Appropriation......... $ 13,000

Salmon Recovery Account‑-State
Appropriation........ $ 500,000

Recreation Resources
Account‑-State Appropriation.... $................................................ 2,584,000

Recreation Resources
Account‑-Federal Appropriation. $ 481,000

NOVA Program Account‑-State
Appropriation........... $ 611,000

Water Quality Account‑‑State
Appropriation.......... $ 700,000

State Toxics Control
Account‑‑State Appropriation.... $ 500,000

Aquatic Lands Enhancement
Account‑‑State

Appropriation................................... $ 200,000

TOTAL
APPROPRIATION...................... $ 14,235,000

The appropriations in
this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations:

(1) (($250,000 of
the general fund‑‑state appropriation for fiscal year 2002,
$250,000 of the general fund‑‑state appropriation for fiscal year
2003)) $500,000 of the salmon recovery account‑-state
appropriation, $500,000 of the water quality account appropriation, and
$500,000 of the state toxics control account appropriation are provided solely
to implement chapter 298, Laws of 2001, Substitute Senate Bill No. 5637
(watershed health monitoring and assessment) and for the development of a
comprehensive salmon recovery and watershed health monitoring strategy and
action plan. The strategy and action plan shall address the monitoring
recommendations of the independent science panel in its report, Recommendations
for Monitoring Salmonid Recovery in Washington State (December 2000), and
of the joint legislative audit and review committee in its report Investing
in the Environment: Environmental Quality Grant and Loan Programs Performance
Audit (January 2001). The action plan shall include an assessment of state
agency operations related to monitoring, evaluation, and adaptive management of
salmon recovery and watershed health; any operational or statutory changes
necessary to implement the strategy and action plan; and funding
recommendations.

(2) $8,000,000 of the
general fund--federal appropriation is provided solely for implementation of
the forest and fish agreement rules. These funds will be passed through to the
department of natural resources and the department of fish and wildlife.

(3) By August 1, 2001,
the interagency committee for outdoor recreation shall complete the public
lands inventory project and submit the project report to the joint legislative
audit and review committee for review.

(4) $200,000 of the
aquatic lands enhancement account‑‑state appropriation is provided
solely to develop and implement a conservation initiative for Maury Island.
The interagency committee for outdoor recreation shall contract with the
Cascade Land Conservancy to develop and implement the initiative and to provide
the following services: (a) Land and resource appraisal; (b) development of a
plan of finance for acquisition of land or interests in land; and (c) conduct
negotiations among purchasers and willing sellers.

Sec. 304. 2001 2nd sp.s. c 7 s 306
(uncodified) is amended to read as follows:

FOR THE CONSERVATION
COMMISSION

General Fund‑-State
Appropriation (FY 2002).... $ ((2,207,000))

2,152,000

General Fund‑-State
Appropriation (FY 2003).... $ ((2,196,000))

2,141,000

Water Quality Account‑-State
Appropriation..... $ ((3,739,000))

2,788,000

TOTAL
APPROPRIATION................. $ ((8,142,000))

7,081,000

The appropriations in
this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations:

(1) $500,000 of the
water quality account‑‑state appropriation is provided solely for
the agriculture, fish, and water negotiations to develop best management
practices that will protect and recover salmon. The commission shall make
grants to allow interest groups to participate in the negotiations.

(2) (($1,601,000 of
the water quality account‑-state appropriation is provided solely for the
completion of limiting factors analysis for watersheds affected by listings of
salmon and bull trout under the federal endangered species act.

(3))) $247,000 of the general fund‑‑state
appropriation for fiscal year 2002 and $247,000 of the general fund‑‑state
appropriation for fiscal year 2003 are provided solely for the implementation
of the Puget Sound work plan and agency action item CC-01.

(((4))) (3)
By March 1, 2002, the conservation reserve enhancement program contract with
the federal farm service agency shall be proposed for amendment to allow
funding of flexible riparian buffer standards consistent with: (a) The
recommendations of the state's agriculture/fish/water negotiation process; or
(b) ordinances adopted through municipal regulations in compliance with the
state growth management act requirement to protect critical areas. These
ordinances shall be scientifically defensible and include programs for
monitoring and adaptive management.

Sec. 305. 2001 2nd sp.s. c 7 s 307
(uncodified) is amended to read as follows:

FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF
FISH AND WILDLIFE

General Fund‑-State
Appropriation (FY 2002).... $ ((51,600,000))

46,997,000

General Fund‑-State
Appropriation (FY 2003).... $ ((50,762,000))

43,786,000

General Fund‑-Federal
Appropriation............. $.................................. ((37,366,000))

37,716,000

General Fund‑-Private/Local
Appropriation...... $ 24,365,000

Off Road Vehicle Account‑-State

Appropriation.............................. $ 475,000

Aquatic Lands Enhancement
Account‑-State

Appropriation.............................. $ ((6,094,000))

5,133,000

Public Safety and Education
Account‑-State

Appropriation.............................. $ ((586,000))

564,000

Recreational Fisheries
Enhancement Account‑-

State Appropriation........................ $ ((3,032,000))

3,354,000

Salmon Recovery Account‑-State

Appropriation.............................. $ 1,612,000

Warm Water Game Fish
Account‑-State

Appropriation.............................. $ 2,567,000

Eastern Washington Pheasant
Enhancement Account‑-

State Appropriation........................ $ 750,000

Wildlife Account‑-State
Appropriation.......... $ ((48,518,000))

50,523,000

Wildlife Account‑-Federal
Appropriation........ $ 38,182,000

Wildlife Account‑-Private/Local

Appropriation.............................. $ 15,133,000

Game Special Wildlife
Account‑-State

Appropriation.............................. $ 1,941,000

Game Special Wildlife
Account‑-Federal

Appropriation.............................. $ 9,591,000

Game Special Wildlife
Account‑-Private/Local

Appropriation.............................. $ 350,000

((Water Quality
Account--State Appropriation... $ 1,000,000))

Environmental Excellence
Account‑-State

Appropriation.............................. $ 15,000

Regional Fisheries Salmonid
Recovery Account‑-

Federal Appropriation...................... $ 1,750,000

Oil Spill Administration
Account‑-State

Appropriation.............................. $ 963,000

Oyster Reserve Land Account‑-State

Appropriation.............................. $ 135,000

TOTAL
APPROPRIATION................. $ ((295,175,000))

285,902,000

The appropriations in
this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations:

(1) $1,682,000 of the
general fund‑-state appropriation for fiscal year 2002 and (($1,682,000))
$835,000 of the general fund‑-state appropriation for fiscal year
2003 are provided solely for the implementation of the Puget Sound work plan
and agency action items DFW-01 through DFW-07.

(2) $200,000 of the
general fund‑-state appropriation for fiscal year 2002 and $200,000 of
the general fund‑-state appropriation for fiscal year 2003 are provided
solely for the department to update the salmon and steelhead stock inventory.

(3) (($550,000 of the
general fund‑-state appropriation for fiscal year 2002 and $550,000 of
the general fund‑-state appropriation for fiscal year 2003 are provided
solely for salmonid smolt production monitoring.

(4))) $250,000 of the general fund‑-state
appropriation for fiscal year 2002 and $250,000 of the general fund‑-state
appropriation for fiscal year 2003 are provided solely for the department to
implement a hatchery endangered species act response. The response shall
include emergency hatchery responses, production, and retrofitting of
hatcheries for salmon recovery.

(((5))) (4)
$600,000 of the general fund‑-state appropriation for fiscal year 2002
and $600,000 of the general fund‑-state appropriation for fiscal year
2003 are provided solely for local salmon recovery technical assistance.

(((6) $1,625,000 of
the general fund‑-state appropriation for fiscal year 2002 and $1,625,000
of the general fund‑-state appropriation for fiscal year 2003 are
provided solely to fund grants to lead entities established under chapter 77.85
RCW. The department, in consultation with the lead entity advisory group and
individual lead entities, shall establish an application process and evaluation
criteria to allocate funds to up to 26 lead entities to provide core activities
identified in chapter 77.85 RCW. Grants to individual lead entities may range
from $37,500 to $150,000 per year.

(7) $125,000 of the
general fund‑-state appropriation for fiscal year 2002 and $125,000 of
the general fund‑-state appropriation for fiscal year 2003 are)) (5) $250,000 of the salmon recovery account
appropriation is provided solely for a grant to the lower Skykomish River
habitat conservation group for the purpose of developing a salmon recovery
plan, in coordination with the lead entity established under chapter 77.85 RCW
for that area. The salmon recovery plan must be consistent with the regional
recovery plans of the Puget Sound shared strategy and criteria developed by the
department for the regional salmon recovery planning program.

(((8) $1,000,000 of
the water quality‑-state appropriation is provided solely to fund grants
to lead entities established under chapter 77.85 RCW or watershed planning
units established under chapter 90.82 RCW that agree to coordinate the
development of comprehensive local and regional salmon recovery plans. The
department shall establish a model for local and regional plans as well as
eligibility and evaluation criteria for distribution of funds to lead entities
and watershed planning units. No annual grant shall exceed $125,000 per year.

(9))) (6) $91,000 of the warm water game fish
account appropriation is provided solely for warm water fish culture at the Rod
Meseberg warm water fish production facility.

(((10) $300,000))
(7) $200,000 of the general fund‑-state appropriation for fiscal
year 2002 and (($300,000)) $200,000 of the general fund‑-state
appropriation for fiscal year 2003 are provided solely to fund ((four)) three
cooperative compliance programs, ((two)) both in Western
Washington and ((two in)) Eastern Washington. The cooperative
compliance program shall conduct fish screen, fish way, and fish passage
barrier assessments and correction plans for landowners seeking cooperative
compliance agreements with the department.

(((11) $1,300,000))
(8) $750,000 of the general fund‑-state appropriation for fiscal
year ((2002)) 2003, $1,300,000 of the salmon recovery account
appropriation and $5,000,000 of the general fund‑-federal
appropriation are provided solely for economic adjustment assistance to fishermen
pursuant to the 1999 Pacific salmon treaty agreement.

(((12) $2,000,000 of
the aquatic lands enhancement account appropriation is provided for cooperative
volunteer projects.

(13))) (9) $810,000 of the general fund‑‑state
appropriation for fiscal year 2002, $790,000 of the general fund‑‑state
appropriation for fiscal year 2003, and $250,000 of the wildlife account‑-state
appropriation are provided solely for enforcement and biological staff to
respond and take appropriate action to public complaints regarding bear and
cougar.

(((14) The
department shall evaluate the fish program to determine if activities are
aligned with agency objectives and if specific activities support the agency's
strategic plan.

(15))) (10) The department shall implement a
lands program manager consolidation program. The consolidation program shall
target the department's south central region. The savings from this
consolidation shall be used by the department for additional maintenance on
agency lands within the south central region.

(((16))) (11)
The department shall implement a survey of all agency lands to evaluate whether
agency lands support the agency's strategic plan and goals. The department
shall submit a report to the governor and legislature by September 1, 2002,
identifying those lands not conforming with the agency's strategic plan and
which should be divested.

(((17))) (12)
$388,000 of the general fund‑‑state appropriation for fiscal year
2002 and $388,000 of the general fund‑‑state appropriation for fiscal
year 2003 are provided solely to implement the forests and fish agreement and
includes funding to continue statewide coordination and implementation of the
forests and fish rules, integration of portions of the hydraulic code into the
forest practices rules to provide permit streamlining, and sharing the
responsibility of developing and implementing the required forests and fish
agreement monitoring and adaptive management program.

(((18))) (13)
$194,000 of the general fund‑‑state appropriation for fiscal year
2002 and $195,000 of the general fund‑-state appropriation for fiscal
year 2003 are provided solely for staff to represent the state's fish and
wildlife interests in hydroelectric project relicensing processes by the
federal energy regulatory commission.

(((19))) (14)
$156,000 of the wildlife account‑-state appropriation is provided solely
for a youth fishing coordinator to develop partnerships with local communities,
and to identify, develop, fund, and promote youth fishing events and
opportunities. Event coordination and promotion services shall be contracted
to a private consultant.

(((20))) (15)
$135,000 of the oyster reserve land account appropriation is provided solely to
implement chapter 273, Laws of 2001, Engrossed Second Substitute House Bill No.
1658 (state oyster reserve lands).

(((21))) (16)
$43,000 of the general fund‑-state appropriation for fiscal year 2002 and
$42,000 of the general fund‑-state appropriation for fiscal year 2003 are
provided solely for staffing and operation of the Tennant Lake interpretive
center.

(((22))) (17)
$32,000 of the general fund‑-state appropriation for fiscal year 2002 and
$33,000 of the general fund‑-state appropriation for fiscal year 2003 are
provided solely to support the activities of the aquatic nuisance species
coordination committee to foster state, federal, tribal, and private
cooperation on aquatic nuisance species issues. The committee shall strive to
prevent the introduction of nonnative aquatic species and to minimize the
spread of species that are introduced.

(((23))) (18)
$25,000 of the wildlife account‑‑state appropriation is provided
solely for the WildWatchCam program to provide internet transmission of live
views of wildlife.

(((24))) (19)
$8,000 of the general fund‑‑state appropriation for fiscal year
2002 and $7,000 of the general fund‑‑state appropriation for fiscal
year 2003 are provided solely for the payment of the department's share of
approved lake management district assessments. By December 15, 2001, the
department shall provide the legislature a summary of its activities related to
lake management districts as well as recommendations for establishing equitable
lake management district assessments.

(20) The department
shall establish a hydraulic project approval program technical review task
force. The task force shall be composed of a balanced representation of both
hydraulic project proponents and conservation interests. The task force shall
conduct a thorough evaluation of the hydraulic project approval program and make
recommendations to the legislature by November 30, 2002, based upon its
evaluation. The task force recommendations shall include a potential fee
structure and schedule for hydraulic project approval permits.

Sec. 306. 2001 2nd sp.s. c 7 s 308
(uncodified) is amended to read as follows:

FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF
NATURAL RESOURCES

General Fund‑-State
Appropriation (FY 2002).... $ ((36,709,000))

36,390,000

General Fund‑-State
Appropriation (FY 2003).... $ ((36,266,000))

34,238,000

General Fund‑-Federal
Appropriation............. $.................................. ((3,440,000))

10,936,000

General Fund‑-Private/Local
Appropriation...... $ ((1,865,000))

2,165,000

Forest Development Account‑-State

Appropriation.............................. $ ((52,511,000))

50,238,000

Off Road Vehicle Account‑-State

Appropriation.............................. $ 3,684,000

Surveys and Maps Account‑-State

Appropriation.............................. $ 2,689,000

Aquatic Lands Enhancement
Account‑-State

Appropriation.............................. $ ((4,458,000))

3,923,000

Resources Management Cost
Account‑-State

Appropriation.............................. $ ((85,979,000))

79,456,000

Surface Mining Reclamation
Account‑-State

Appropriation.............................. $ ((2,549,000))

2,416,000

Salmon Recovery Account‑-State

Appropriation.............................. $ 625,000

Water Quality Account‑-State
Appropriation..... $ 2,900,000

Aquatic Land Dredged
Material Disposal Site

Account‑-State
Appropriation............... $ 1,056,000

Natural Resource
Conservation Areas Stewardship

Account Appropriation...................... $ ((34,000))

209,000

State Toxics Control
Account‑-State

Appropriation.............................. $ 1,865,000

Air Pollution Control
Account‑-State

Appropriation.............................. $ 629,000

Metals Mining Account‑-State
Appropriation..... $ 64,000

Agricultural College Trust
Management Account

Appropriation.............................. $ 1,790,000

Derelict Vessel Removal
Account‑-State

Appropriation.............................. $ 89,000

TOTAL
APPROPRIATION................. $ ((237,248,000))

235,362,000

The appropriations in
this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations:

(1) $18,000 of the
general fund‑-state appropriation for fiscal year 2002, $18,000 of the
general fund‑-state appropriation for fiscal year 2003, and $998,000 of
the aquatic lands enhancement account appropriation are provided solely for the
implementation of the Puget Sound work plan and agency action items DNR-01,
DNR-02, and DNR-04.

(2)(a) $625,000 of the
salmon recovery account appropriation, $1,250,000 of the general fund‑-state
appropriation for fiscal year 2002, $1,250,000 of the general fund‑‑state
appropriation for fiscal year 2003, and $2,900,000 of the water quality account‑-state
appropriation are provided solely for implementation of chapter 4, Laws of 1999
sp. sess. (forest practices and salmon recovery).

(b) $250,000 of the
salmon recovery account appropriation is provided solely for and shall be
expended to develop a small forest landowner data base in ten counties.
$150,000 of the amount in this subsection shall be used to purchase the data.
$100,000 of the amount in this subsection shall purchase contracted analysis of
the data.

(3) $2,000,000 of the
forest development account appropriation is provided solely for road
decommissioning, maintenance, and repair in the Lake Whatcom watershed.

(4) $543,000 of the
forest fire protection assessment account appropriation, $22,000 of the forest
development account appropriation, and $76,000 of the resource management cost
account appropriation are provided solely to implement chapter 279, Laws of 2001,
Substitute House Bill No. 2104, (modifying forest fire protection assessments).

(5) $895,000 of the
general fund‑-state appropriation for fiscal year 2002 and (($895,000))
$354,000 of the general fund‑-state appropriation for fiscal year
2003 shall be transferred to the agricultural college trust management
account and are provided solely to manage approximately 70,700 acres of
Washington State University's agricultural college trust lands.

(((7))) (6)
$4,000 of the general fund‑‑state appropriation for fiscal year
2002 and $4,000 of the general fund‑‑state appropriation for fiscal
year 2003 are provided solely to compensate the forest board trust for a
portion of the lease to the Crescent television improvement district consistent
with RCW 79.12.055.

(((8) The
appropriation from the off-road vehicle account‑‑state is provided
under RCW 46.09.170(1)(a)(ii) and is provided solely for projects that bring
off-road vehicle recreation facilities into compliance with the requirements,
guidelines, spirit, and intent of the federal Americans with disabilities act
and do not compromise or impair sensitive natural resources.

(9))) (7) $828,000 of the surface mine
reclamation account appropriation is provided to implement Engrossed House Bill
No. 1845 (surface mining fees). If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2001,
the amount provided in this subsection shall lapse.

(((10))) (8)
$800,000 of the aquatic lands enhancement account appropriation and $200,000 of
the resources management cost account appropriation are provided solely to
improve asset management on state-owned aquatic lands. The department shall
streamline the use authorization process for businesses operating on
state-owned aquatic lands and issue decisions on 325 pending lease applications
by June 30, ((2002)) 2003. The department, in consultation with
the attorney general, shall develop a strategic program to resolve claims
related to contaminated sediments on state-owned aquatic lands.

(((11))) (9)
$246,000 of the resource management cost account appropriation is provided to
the department for continuing control of spruce budworm.

(((12))) (10)
$100,000 of the aquatic lands enhancement account is provided solely for the
development and initial implementation of a statewide management plan for marine
reserves.

(((13))) (11)
$7,657,859 of the general fund‑-state appropriation for fiscal year 2002
and $7,657,859 of the general fund‑-state appropriation for fiscal year
2003 are provided solely for emergency fire suppression.

(((14))) (12)
$7,216,000 of the general fund‑-state appropriation for fiscal year 2002
and $6,584,000 of the general fund‑-state appropriation for fiscal year
2003 are provided solely for fire protection activities and to implement
provisions of the 1997 tridata fire program review.

(((15) $275,000))
(13) $100,000 of the general fund‑‑state appropriation for
fiscal year 2002, (($275,000 of the general fund‑‑state
appropriation for fiscal year 2003, and)) $550,000 of the aquatic lands
enhancement account‑-state appropriation, and $209,000 of the natural
resources conservation areas stewardship account‑-state appropriation
are provided solely to the department for planning, management, and stewardship
of natural area preserves and natural resources conservation areas.

(((16))) (14)
$187,000 of the general fund‑-state appropriation for fiscal year 2002((,
$188,000 of the general fund‑-state appropriation for fiscal year 2003,
and $375,000 of the aquatic lands enhancement account‑-state
appropriation are)) is provided solely to the department for
maintenance and stewardship of public lands.

(((17))) (15)
$100,000 of the general fund‑-state appropriation for fiscal year 2002,
$100,000 of the general fund‑-state appropriation for fiscal year 2003,
and $400,000 of the aquatic lands enhancement account appropriation are
provided solely for spartina control.

(16) Within the
amounts appropriated in this section, the department shall review the current
procedures used to mobilize resources to fight forest fires under the state mobilization
plan and through the department of natural resources. The review must include
recommendations to ensure that the people closest to a fire are called first,
to allow private contractors to be mobilized under the state mobilization plan,
and to identify other efficiencies. The department shall review recent studies
regarding ways to improve forest fire fighting in the state. The department
shall consult with representatives of private contractors, fire districts,
municipal fire departments, the state fire marshal, appropriate federal
agencies, and other interested groups in developing the recommendations. The
department shall report their findings and recommendations to the appropriate
committees of the legislature by January 1, 2003.

(17) Within the
amounts appropriated in this section the department shall implement Substitute
House Bill No. 2294 (recreation sites).

(18) $22,000 of the
general fund‑-state appropriation for fiscal year 2003, $22,000 of the
resource management account‑-state appropriation, and $22,000 of the
forest development account‑-state appropriation are provided solely for
the department to work jointly with the department of transportation, the
military department, and the Washington state patrol, in coordination with the
state interoperability executive committee, on the development and
implementation of a secure geographical information system (GIS) database to
illustrate locations and specifications of statewide radio and microwave
towers.

(19) $250,000 of the
resource management cost account‑-state appropriation and $250,000 of the
forest development account‑-state appropriation are provided solely for
deposit in the contract harvesting revolving account‑-nonappropriated to
implement Substitute Senate Bill No. 6257 (contract harvesting). If the bill
is not enacted by June 30, 2002, the amounts appropriated in this subsection
shall lapse.

Sec. 307. 2001 2nd sp.s. c 7 s 309
(uncodified) is amended to read as follows:

FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF
AGRICULTURE

General Fund‑-State
Appropriation (FY 2002).... $ ((8,165,000))

8,040,000

General Fund‑-State
Appropriation (FY 2003).... $ ((8,024,000))

7,534,000

General Fund‑-Federal
Appropriation............. $.................................. ((4,636,000))

6,741,000

General fund‑-Private/Local
Appropriation...... $ 1,110,000

Aquatic Lands Enhancement
Account‑-State

Appropriation.............................. $ 2,304,000

State Toxics Control
Account‑-State

Appropriation.............................. $ ((2,672,000))

2,917,000

TOTAL
APPROPRIATION................. $ ((26,911,000))

28,646,000

The appropriations in
this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations:

(1) $36,000 of the
general fund‑‑state appropriation for fiscal year 2002 and $37,000
of the general fund‑‑state appropriation for fiscal year 2003 are
provided solely for implementation of the Puget Sound work plan and agency
action item DOA-01.

(2) (($832,000))
(a) $1,077,000 of the state toxics control account appropriation,
$245,000 of the general fund‑-federal appropriation, and $298,000 of
the agricultural local account are provided solely to establish a program to
monitor pesticides in surface water, sample and analyze surface waters for
pesticide residues, evaluate pesticide exposure on salmon species listed
under the provisions of the endangered species act, and implement actions
needed to protect salmonids.

(b) $245,000 of the
amount provided from the state toxics control account in (a) of this subsection
is provided solely as a match for federal funding. If an equivalent federal
match is not provided, this amount shall lapse.

(3) $1,480,000 of the
aquatic lands enhancement account appropriation is provided solely to initiate
a ((four-year)) plan to eradicate infestations of spartina in Puget Sound,
Hood Canal, and Grays Harbor and begin the reduction in spartina infestations
in Willapa Bay.

(4) $75,000 of the
general fund‑-state appropriation for fiscal year 2002, $75,000 of the
general fund‑-state appropriation for fiscal year 2003, and $150,000 of
the general fund‑-federal appropriation are provided solely to the small
farm and direct marketing program to support small farms in complying with
federal, state, and local regulations, facilitating access to food processing
centers, and assisting with grant funding requests.

(5) (($350,000))
$225,000 of the general fund‑-state appropriation for fiscal year
2002, (($350,000)) $100,000 of the general fund‑-state
appropriation for fiscal year 2003, and $700,000 of the general fund‑-private/local
appropriation are provided solely to implement chapter 324, Laws of 2001
(Substitute House Bill No. 1891, marketing of agriculture). Of these amounts,
$40,000 of the general fund‑-state appropriation is provided solely to
match funds provided by the red raspberry commission to address unfair trade
practices by other countries that result in sales in Washington that are below
the cost of production in Washington.

(6) $450,000 of the
state toxics control account‑-state appropriation is provided solely for
deposit in the agricultural local nonappropriated account for the plant pest
account to reimburse county horticultural pest and disease boards for the costs
of pest control activities, including tree removal, conducted under their
existing authorities in chapters 15.08 and 15.09 RCW.

(7) The district
manager for district two as defined in WAC 16-458-075 shall transfer four
hundred fifty thousand dollars from the fruit and vegetable district fund to
the plant pest account within the agricultural local fund. The amount
transferred must be derived from fees collected for state inspections of tree
fruits and shall be used solely to reimburse county horticultural pest and
disease boards in district two for the cost of pest control activities,
including tree removal, conducted under their existing authority in chapters
15.08 and 15.09 RCW. The transfer of funds shall occur by July 1, 2001. On
June 30, 2003, any unexpended portion of the four hundred fifty thousand
dollars shall be returned to the fruit and vegetable district fund.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
308. A new section is added
to 2001 2nd sp.s. c 7 (uncodified) to read as follows:

(1) The task force on
the funding of state parks and outdoor recreation is hereby created, to
consider and develop legislation on the operation and funding of the state
parks and outdoor recreation programs of the state. The committee shall be
composed of fifteen members, four members of the senate appointed by the
president of the senate and to include two members from each caucus, four
members of the house of representatives appointed by the speaker of the house
of representatives and to include two members from each caucus, three members
appointed by the governor and to include at least one representative of a broad
coalition of users of the state's parks and outdoor recreation programs, one
member appointed by the commissioner of public lands, one member appointed by
the chair of the fish and wildlife commission, and one member appointed by the
chair of the state parks and recreation commission, and one member appointed by
the interagency committee for outdoor recreation. The task force shall elect
its own officers, shall be staffed by staff of the legislature, the executive
agencies, and the office of the governor, and may appoint an advisory committee
of additional persons and organizations interested in the operation and funding
of state parks and outdoor recreation.

(2) The task force
shall specifically review and incorporate into its work the reports prepared
pursuant to budget provisos by the Washington state parks and recreation
commission regarding its operating budget needs, deferred maintenance backlog,
and capital facilities renovation and replacement requirements.

(3) The
task force shall prepare recommendations for improving the operation of state
parks and outdoor recreation programs and for securing adequate funding on a
permanent basis for supporting the needs of the state parks and outdoor
recreation programs of the state, including a legislative proposal for the
implementation of an evergreen recreation pass that would combine the various
permits and licenses of the participating agencies into a single pass for
recreational day use. The recommendations shall be developed no later than
January 1, 2003, and shall be designed for enactment by the legislature during
2003 for implementation in the 2005-07 biennium. The task force shall cease to
exist on June 30, 2003.

(End
of part)

PART
IV

TRANSPORTATION

Sec. 401. 2001 2nd sp.s. c 7 s 401
(uncodified) is amended to read as follows:

FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF LICENSING

General Fund‑-State
Appropriation (FY 2002).... $ ((5,389,000))

5,366,000

General Fund‑-State
Appropriation (FY 2003).... $ ((5,377,000))

5,267,000

Architects' License Account‑-State

Appropriation.............................. $ ((707,000))

684,000

Cemetery Account‑-State
Appropriation.......... $ ((214,000))

200,000

Professional Engineers'
Account‑-State

Appropriation.............................. $ ((3,032,000))

3,102,000

Real Estate Commission‑-State
Appropriation.... $ ((6,777,000))

6,837,000

Master License Account‑-State
Appropriation.... $ ((8,409,000))

8,278,000

Uniform Commercial Code
Account‑-State

Appropriation.............................. $ ((3,104,000))

2,900,000

Real Estate Education
Account‑-State

Appropriation.............................. $ ((301,000))

276,000

Funeral Directors and
Embalmers Account‑-State

Appropriation.............................. $ ((490,000))

459,000

Washington Real Estate
Research Account

Appropriation.............................. $ ((316,000))

307,000

Data Processing Revolving
Account‑-State

Appropriation.............................. $ 23,000

TOTAL
APPROPRIATION................. $ ((34,139,000))

33,699,000

The appropriations in
this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations: In
accordance with RCW 43.24.086, it is the policy of the state of Washington that
the cost of each professional, occupational, or business licensing program be fully
borne by the members of that profession, occupation, or business. For each
licensing program covered by RCW 43.24.086, the department shall set fees at
levels sufficient to fully cover the cost of administering the licensing
program, including any costs associated with policy enhancements funded in the
2001-03 fiscal biennium. Pursuant to RCW 43.135.055, during the 2001-03 fiscal
biennium, the department may increase fees in excess of the fiscal growth
factor if the increases are necessary to fully fund the costs of the licensing
programs.

Sec. 402. 2001 2nd sp.s. c 7 s 402
(uncodified) is amended to read as follows:

FOR THE STATE PATROL

General Fund‑-State
Appropriation (FY 2002).... $ ((21,890,000))

21,567,000

General Fund‑-State
Appropriation (FY 2003).... $ ((8,066,000))

8,133,000

General Fund‑-Federal
Appropriation............. $.................................. 4,178,000

General Fund‑-Private/Local
Appropriation...... $ 369,000

Death Investigations
Account‑-State

Appropriation.............................. $ ((3,899,000))

4,024,000

Public Safety and Education
Account‑-State

Appropriation.............................. $ ((16,070,000))

14,790,000

County Criminal Justice
Assistance Account‑-State

Appropriation.............................. $ ((2,490,000))

2,870,000

Municipal Criminal Justice
Assistance Account‑-

State Appropriation........................ $ ((987,000))

1,367,000

Fire Service Trust Account‑-State

Appropriation.............................. $ 125,000

Fire Service Training
Account‑-State

Appropriation.............................. $ 6,328,000

State Toxics Control
Account‑-State

Appropriation.............................. $ 461,000

Violence Reduction and Drug
Enforcement Account‑-

State Appropriation........................ $ 277,000

Fingerprint Identification
Account‑-State

Appropriation.............................. $ ((3,684,000))

5,316,000

TOTAL
APPROPRIATION................. $ ((68,824,000))

69,805,000

The appropriations in
this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations:

(1) $354,000 of the
public safety and education account appropriation is provided solely for
additional law enforcement and security coverage on the west capitol campus.

(2) When a program
within the agency is supported by more than one fund and one of the funds is
the state general fund, the agency shall charge its expenditures in such a
manner as to ensure that each fund is charged in proportion to its support of
the program. The agency may adopt guidelines for the implementation of this
subsection. The guidelines may account for federal matching requirements,
budget provisos, or other requirements to spend other moneys in a particular
manner.

(3) $100,000 of the
public safety and education account appropriation is provided solely for the
implementation of Substitute Senate Bill No. 5896 (DNA testing of evidence).
If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2001, the amount provided in this
subsection shall lapse.

(4) $1,419,000 of the
public safety and education account‑-state appropriation is provided
solely for combating the proliferation of methamphetamine labs. The amounts in
this subsection are provided solely for the following activities: (a) The
establishment of a regional methamphetamine enforcement, training, and
education program; (b) additional members for the statewide methamphetamine
incident response team; and (c) two forensic scientists with the necessary
equipment to perform lab analysis in the crime laboratory division.

(((6) Beginning in
fiscal year 2003, the funding provided in this subsection assumes a transfer of
$12,634,000 of state patrol expenditures from the omnibus operating budget to
the transportation budget. If new transportation revenue is not enacted before
this time, the omnibus budget will restore this funding in the 2002 legislative
session.))

(5)
Within the amounts appropriated in this section, funding is provided to
implement Substitute House Bill No. 2468 (offender DNA database).

(End
of part)

PART
V

EDUCATION

Sec. 501. 2001 2nd sp.s. c 7 s 501
(uncodified) is amended to read as follows:

FOR THE SUPERINTENDENT OF PUBLIC
INSTRUCTION

(1) STATE AGENCY
OPERATIONS

General Fund‑-State
Appropriation (FY 2002).... $ ((12,357,000))

12,302,000

General Fund‑-State
Appropriation (FY 2003).... $ ((12,266,000))

11,870,000

General Fund‑-Federal
Appropriation............. $.................................. ((23,668,000))

53,760,000

TOTAL
APPROPRIATION................. $ ((48,291,000))

77,932,000

The appropriations in
this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations:

(a) $11,385,000 of the
general fund‑-state appropriation for fiscal year 2002 and (($11,394,000))
$10,943,000 of the general fund‑-state appropriation for fiscal
year 2003 are provided solely for the operation and expenses of the office of
the superintendent of public instruction. Of this amount, $350,000 is provided
in each fiscal year for upgrading information systems including the general
apportionment and student information systems.

(b) (($541,000))
$486,000 of the general fund‑-state appropriation for fiscal year
2002 and (($441,000)) $496,000 of the general fund‑-state
appropriation for fiscal year 2003 are provided solely for the operation and
expenses of the state board of education, including basic education assistance
activities. $45,000 of the general fund‑-state appropriation for
fiscal year 2002((, $100,000 is)) and $55,000 of the general fund‑-state
appropriation for fiscal year 2003 are provided solely for certificate of
mastery development and validation.

(c) $431,000 of the
general fund‑-state appropriation for fiscal year 2002 and $431,000 of
the general fund‑-state appropriation for fiscal year 2003 are provided
solely for the operation and expenses of the Washington professional educator
standards board.

(d) $49,000 of the
general fund‑-state appropriation for fiscal year 2003 is provided solely
to support the joint task force on local effort assistance created by House
Bill No. 3011.

(2) STATEWIDE PROGRAMS

General Fund‑-State
Appropriation (FY 2002).... $ ((17,274,000))

17,280,000

General Fund‑-State
Appropriation (FY 2003).... $ ((19,407,000))

17,039,000

General Fund‑-Federal
Appropriation............. $.................................. ((213,016,000))

85,395,000

TOTAL
APPROPRIATION................. $ ((249,697,000))

119,714,000

The appropriations in
this subsection are provided solely for the statewide programs specified in
this subsection and are subject to the following conditions and limitations:

(a) HEALTH AND SAFETY

(i) A maximum of
$150,000 of the general fund‑-state appropriation for fiscal year 2002 ((and
a maximum of $150,000 of the fiscal year 2003 appropriation are)) is
provided for alcohol and drug prevention programs pursuant to RCW 66.08.180.

(ii) A maximum
$2,621,000 of the general fund‑-state appropriation for fiscal year 2002
and a maximum of $2,621,000 of the general fund‑-state appropriation for
fiscal year 2003 are provided for a corps of nurses located at educational
service districts, as determined by the superintendent of public instruction,
to be dispatched to the most needy schools to provide direct care to students,
health education, and training for school staff.

(iii) A maximum of
$100,000 of the general fund‑‑state appropriation for fiscal year
2002 and a maximum of $100,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2003 are provided to create a school safety center subject to the
following conditions and limitations.

(A) The safety center
shall: Disseminate successful models of school safety plans and cooperative
efforts; provide assistance to schools to establish a comprehensive safe school
plan; select models of cooperative efforts that have been proven successful;
act as an information dissemination and resource center when an incident occurs
in a school district either in Washington or in another state; coordinate
activities relating to school safety; review and approve manuals and curricula
used for school safety models and training; and develop and maintain a school
safety information web site.

(B) The school safety
center shall be established in the office of the superintendent of public
instruction. The superintendent of public instruction shall participate in a
school safety center advisory committee that includes representatives of
educators, classified staff, principals, superintendents, administrators, the
American society for industrial security, the state criminal justice training
commission, and others deemed appropriate and approved by the school safety
center advisory committee. Members of the committee shall be chosen by the
groups they represent. In addition, the Washington association of sheriffs and
police chiefs shall appoint representatives of law enforcement to participate
on the school safety center advisory committee. The advisory committee shall
select a chair.

(C) The school safety
center advisory committee shall develop a training program, using the best
practices in school safety, for all school safety personnel.

(iv) A maximum of
$113,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal year 2002 and a
maximum of $103,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal year
2003 are provided for a school safety training program provided by the criminal
justice training commission subject to the following conditions and
limitations:

(A) The criminal
justice training commission with assistance of the school safety center
advisory committee established in section 2(b)(iii) of this section shall
develop manuals and curricula for a training program for all school safety
personnel.

(B) The Washington
state criminal justice training commission, in collaboration with the advisory
committee, shall provide the school safety training for all school
administrators and school safety personnel, including school safety personnel
hired after the effective date of this section.

(v) A maximum of
$250,000 of the general fund‑‑state appropriation for fiscal year
2002 and a maximum of $250,000 of the general fund‑‑state
appropriation for fiscal year 2003 are provided for training in school
districts regarding the prevention of bullying and harassment. The
superintendent of public instruction shall use the funds to develop a model
bullying and harassment prevention policy and training materials for school and
educational service districts. The information may be disseminated in a
variety of ways, including workshops and other staff development activities
such as videotape or broadcasts.

(vi) A maximum of (($6,042,000))
$6,048,000 of the general fund‑‑state appropriation for
fiscal year 2002 and a maximum of (($6,028,000)) $6,084,000 of
the general fund‑‑state appropriation for fiscal year 2003 are
provided for a safety allocation to districts subject to the following
conditions and limitations:

(A) The funds shall be
allocated at a maximum rate of $6.36 per year per full-time equivalent K-12
student enrolled in each school district in the prior school year.

(B) Districts ((shall))
may expend funds allocated under this section to develop and implement
strategies identified in a comprehensive safe school plan pursuant to House
Bill No. 1818 (student safety) or Senate Bill No. 5543 (student safety). If
neither bill is enacted by June 30, ((2001)) 2002, expenditures
of the safety allocation shall be subject to (i), (ii), and (iii) of this
subsection (a)(vi)(B).

(i) School districts
shall use the funds for school safety purposes and are encouraged to prioritize
the use of funds allocated under this section for the development, by September
1, 2002, of school-based comprehensive safe school plans that include prevention,
intervention, all-hazards/crisis response, and post crisis recovery
components. When developing comprehensive safe school plans, school districts
are encouraged to use model school safety plans as developed by the school
safety center. Implementation of comprehensive safe school plans may include,
but is not limited to, employing or contracting for building security monitors
in schools during school hours and school events; research-based early
prevention and intervention programs; training for school staff, including
security personnel; equipment; school safety hotlines; before, during, and
after-school student and staff safety; minor building renovations related to
student and staff safety and security; and other purposes identified in the
comprehensive safe school plan.

(ii) Each school may
conduct an evaluation of its comprehensive safe school plan and conduct
reviews, drills, or simulated practices in coordination with local fire, law
enforcement, and medical emergency management agencies.

(iii) By September 1,
2002, school districts shall provide the superintendent of public instruction
information regarding the purposes for which the safety allocation funding was
used and the status of the comprehensive safe school plans for the schools in
the school district.

(vii) A maximum of
$200,000 of the general fund‑-state appropriation for fiscal year 2002, a
maximum of $200,000 of the general fund‑-state appropriation for fiscal
year 2003, and $400,000 of the general fund‑-federal appropriation
transferred from the department of health are provided for a program that
provides grants to school districts for media campaigns promoting sexual
abstinence and addressing the importance of delaying sexual activity,
pregnancy, and childbearing until individuals are ready to nurture and support
their children. Grants to the school districts shall be for projects that are
substantially designed and produced by students. The grants shall require a
local private sector match equal to one-half of the state grant, which may
include in-kind contribution of technical or other assistance from consultants
or firms involved in public relations, advertising, broadcasting, and graphics
or video production or other related fields.

(viii) A maximum of
$150,000 of the general fund‑-state appropriation for fiscal year 2002
and a maximum of $150,000 of the general fund‑-state appropriation for
fiscal year 2003 are provided for a nonviolence and leadership training program
provided by the institute for community leadership. The program shall provide
the following:

(A) Statewide
nonviolence leadership coaches training program for certification of
educational employees and community members in nonviolence leadership
workshops;

(B) Statewide
leadership nonviolence student exchanges, training, and speaking opportunities
for student workshop participants; and

(C) A request for
proposal process, with up to 80 percent funding, for nonviolence leadership
workshops serving at least 12 school districts with direct programming in 36
elementary, middle, and high schools throughout Washington state.

(ix) A maximum of
$1,500,000 of the general fund‑-state appropriation for fiscal year 2002
and a maximum of (($1,500,000)) $750,000 of the general fund‑-state
appropriation for fiscal year 2003 are provided for school district petitions
to juvenile court for truant students as provided in RCW 28A.225.030 and
28A.225.035. Allocation of this money to school districts shall be based on
the number of petitions filed.

(b) TECHNOLOGY

(i) A maximum of
$2,000,000 of the general fund‑-state appropriation for fiscal year 2002
and a maximum of $2,000,000 of the general fund‑-state appropriation for
fiscal year 2003 are provided for K-20 telecommunications network technical support
in the K-12 sector to prevent system failures and avoid interruptions in school
utilization of the data processing and video-conferencing capabilities of the
network. These funds may be used to purchase engineering and advanced
technical support for the network. A maximum of $650,000 of this amount may be
expended for state-level administration and staff training on the K-20 network.

(ii) A maximum of
$617,000 of the general fund‑-state appropriation for fiscal year 2002
and a maximum of $1,112,000 of the general fund‑-state appropriation for
fiscal year 2003 are provided for the Washington state leadership assistance
for science education reform (LASER) regional partnership coordinated at the
Pacific Science Center.

(c) GRANTS AND
ALLOCATIONS

(i) A maximum of
$25,000 of the general fund‑-state appropriation for fiscal year 2002 and
a maximum of $1,975,000 of the general fund‑-state appropriation for
fiscal year 2003 are provided for Senate Bill No. 5695 (alternative
certification routes). If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2001, the amount
provided in this subsection shall lapse. The stipend allocation per teacher
candidate and mentor pair shall not exceed (($28,318)) $28,456.
The professional educator standards board shall report to the education
committees of the legislature by December 15, 2002, on the districts applying
for partnership grants, the districts receiving partnership grants, and the
number of interns per route enrolled in each district.

(ii) A maximum of
$31,500 of the general fund‑-state appropriation for fiscal year 2002 and
a maximum of $31,500 of the general fund‑-state appropriation for fiscal
year 2003 are provided for operation of the Cispus environmental learning
center.

(iii) A maximum of
$150,000 of the general fund‑-state appropriation for fiscal year 2002
and a maximum of $150,000 of the general fund‑-state appropriation for
fiscal year 2003 are provided for the Washington civil liberties education
program.

(iv) A maximum of
$2,150,000 of the general fund‑-state appropriation for fiscal year 2002
((and a maximum of $2,150,000 of the general fund‑-state appropriation
for fiscal year 2003 are)) is provided for complex need grants. The
maximum grants for eligible districts are specified in LEAP Document 30C as
developed on April 27, 1997, at 03:00 hours.

(v) A maximum of
$1,377,000 of the general fund‑-state appropriation for fiscal year 2002
((and a maximum of $1,377,000 of the general fund‑-state appropriation
for fiscal year 2003 are)) is provided for educational centers,
including state support activities. (($100,000)) $50,000 of this
amount is provided to help stabilize funding through distribution among
existing education centers that are currently funded by the state at an amount
less than (($100,000 a biennium)) $50,000 a year.

(vi) A maximum of
$50,000 of the general fund‑-state appropriation for fiscal year 2002 ((and
a maximum of $50,000 of the general fund‑-state appropriation for fiscal
year 2003 are)) is provided for an organization in southwest
Washington that received funding from the Spokane educational center in the
1995-97 biennium and provides educational services to students who have dropped
out of school.

(vii) A maximum of
$1,262,000 of the general fund‑-state appropriation for fiscal year 2002 and
a maximum of $1,262,000 of the general fund‑-state appropriation for
fiscal year 2003 are provided for in-service training and educational programs
conducted by the Pacific Science Center.

(viii) A maximum of
$100,000 of the general fund‑-state appropriation for fiscal year 2002
and a maximum of $100,000 of the general fund‑-state appropriation for
fiscal year 2003 are provided to support vocational student leadership
organizations.

(ix) $9,900,000 of the
general fund‑-federal appropriation is provided for the Washington Reads
project to enhance high quality reading instruction and school programs.

(x) A maximum of
$150,000 of the general fund‑-state appropriation for fiscal year 2002
and a maximum of $150,000 of the general fund‑-state appropriation for
fiscal year 2003 are provided for the World War II oral history project.

(xi) (($30,700,000))
$13,942,000 of the general fund‑-federal appropriation is provided
for school renovation grants for school districts with urgent school renovation
needs, special education-related renovations, and technology related
renovations.

(xii) (($1,952,000))
$4,962,000 of the general fund‑-federal appropriation is provided
for LINKS technology challenge grants to integrate educational reform with
state technology systems and development of technology products that enhance
professional development and classroom instruction.

(xiii) (($423,000))
$536,000 of the general fund‑-federal appropriation is provided
for the advanced placement fee program to increase opportunities for low-income
students and under-represented populations to participate in advanced placement
courses and to increase the capacity of schools to provide advanced placement
courses to students.

(xiv) $12,318,000 of
the general fund‑-federal appropriation is provided for comprehensive
school reform demonstration projects to provide grants to low-income schools
for improving student achievement through adoption and implementation of
research-based curricula and instructional programs.

(xv) (($4,228,000))
$2,612,000 of the general fund‑-federal appropriation is provided
for teacher quality enhancement through provision of consortia grants to school
districts and higher education institutions to improve teacher preparation and
professional development.

Sec. 502. 2001 2nd sp.s. c 7 s 502
(uncodified) is amended to read as follows:

FOR THE SUPERINTENDENT
OF PUBLIC INSTRUCTION‑-FOR GENERAL
APPORTIONMENT

General Fund‑-State
Appropriation (FY 2002).... $ ((3,760,826,000))

3,786,124,000

General Fund‑-State
Appropriation (FY 2003).... $ ((3,751,350,000))

3,722,279,000

TOTAL
APPROPRIATION................. $ ((7,512,176,000))

7,508,403,000

The appropriations in
this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations:

(1) Each general fund
fiscal year appropriation includes such funds as are necessary to complete the
school year ending in the fiscal year and for prior fiscal year adjustments.

(2) Allocations for
certificated staff salaries for the 2001-02 and 2002-03 school years shall be
determined using formula‑generated staff units calculated pursuant to
this subsection. Staff allocations for small school enrollments in (d) through
(f) of this subsection shall be reduced for vocational full-time equivalent
enrollments. Staff allocations for small school enrollments in grades K-6
shall be the greater of that generated under (a) of this subsection, or under
(d) and (e) of this subsection. Certificated staffing allocations shall be as
follows:

(a) On the basis of
each 1,000 average annual full-time equivalent enrollments, excluding full-time
equivalent enrollment otherwise recognized for certificated staff unit
allocations under (c) through (f) of this subsection:

(i) Four certificated
administrative staff units per thousand full-time equivalent students in grades
K-12;

(ii) 49 certificated
instructional staff units per thousand full-time equivalent students in grades
K-3;

(iii) Forty‑six
certificated instructional staff units per thousand full-time equivalent
students in grades 4-12; and

(iv) An additional 4.2
certificated instructional staff units for grades K-3 and an additional 7.2
certificated instructional staff units for grade 4. Any funds allocated for
the additional certificated units provided in this subsection (iv) shall not be
considered as basic education funding;

(v) For the 2001-02
school year, for class size reduction and expanded learning opportunities
under the better schools program, an additional 2.2 certificated instructional
staff units for grades K-4 per thousand full-time equivalent students. Funds
allocated for these additional certificated units shall not be considered as
basic education funding. The allocation may be used for reducing class sizes
in grades K-4 or to provide additional classroom contact hours for
kindergarten, before-and-after-school programs, weekend school programs, summer
school programs, and intercession opportunities to assist elementary school
students in meeting the essential academic learning requirements and student
assessment performance standards. For purposes of this subsection, additional
classroom contact hours provided by teachers beyond the normal school day under
a supplemental contract shall be converted to a certificated full-time
equivalent by dividing the classroom contact hours by 900.

(A) Funds provided
under this subsection (2)(a)(iv) and (v) in excess of the amount required to
maintain the statutory minimum ratio established under RCW 28A.150.260(2)(b)
shall be allocated only if the district documents an actual ratio in grades
K-4 equal to or greater than 55.4 certificated instructional staff per
thousand full-time equivalent students ((in grades K-4)) in the
2001-02 school year and 53.2 certificated instructional staff per thousand
full-time equivalent students in the 2002-03 school year. For any school
district documenting a lower certificated instructional staff ratio, the
allocation shall be based on the district's actual grades K-4 certificated
instructional staff ratio achieved in that school year, or the statutory
minimum ratio established under RCW 28A.150.260(2)(b), if greater;

(B) Districts at or
above 51.0 certificated instructional staff per one thousand full-time
equivalent students in grades K-4 may dedicate up to 1.3 of the 55.4 funding
ratio in the 2001-02 school year, and up to 1.3 of the 53.2 funding ratio in
the 2002-03 school year, to employ additional classified instructional
assistants assigned to basic education classrooms in grades K-4. For purposes
of documenting a district's staff ratio under this section, funds used by the
district to employ additional classified instructional assistants shall be
converted to a certificated staff equivalent and added to the district's actual
certificated instructional staff ratio. Additional classified instructional
assistants, for the purposes of this subsection, shall be determined using the
1989-90 school year as the base year;

(C) Any district maintaining
a ratio in grades K-4 equal to or greater than 55.4 certificated
instructional staff per thousand full-time equivalent students in ((grades
K-4)) the 2001-02 school year, and a ratio equal to or greater than 53.2
certificated instructional staff per thousand full-time equivalent students in
the 2002-03 school year, may use allocations generated under this
subsection (2)(a)(iv) and (v) in excess of that required to maintain the
minimum ratio established under RCW 28A.150.260(2)(b) to employ additional
basic education certificated instructional staff or classified instructional
assistants in grades 5-6. Funds allocated under this subsection (2)(a)(iv) and
(v) shall only be expended to reduce class size in grades K-6. No more than
1.3 of the certificated instructional funding ratio amount may be expended for
provision of classified instructional assistants;

(b) For school
districts with a minimum enrollment of 250 full-time equivalent students whose
full-time equivalent student enrollment count in a given month exceeds the
first of the month full-time equivalent enrollment count by 5 percent, an
additional state allocation of 110 percent of the share that such increased
enrollment would have generated had such additional full-time equivalent students
been included in the normal enrollment count for that particular month;

(c)(i) On the basis of
full-time equivalent enrollment in:

(A) Vocational
education programs approved by the superintendent of public instruction, a
maximum of 0.92 certificated instructional staff units and 0.08 certificated
administrative staff units for each 19.5 full-time equivalent vocational
students; and

(B) Skills center
programs meeting the standards for skills center funding established in January
1999 by the superintendent of public instruction, 0.92 certificated
instructional staff units and 0.08 certificated administrative units for each
16.67 full-time equivalent vocational students; ((and))

(ii) Vocational
full-time equivalent enrollment shall be reported on the same monthly basis as
the enrollment for students eligible for basic support, and payments shall be
adjusted for reported vocational enrollments on the same monthly basis as those
adjustments for enrollment for students eligible for basic support; and

(iii) Indirect cost
charges by a school district to vocational-secondary programs shall not exceed
15 percent of the combined basic education and vocational enhancement
allocations of state funds;

(d) For districts
enrolling not more than twenty‑five average annual full-time equivalent
students in grades K-8, and for small school plants within any school district
which have been judged to be remote and necessary by the state board of
education and enroll not more than twenty‑five average annual full-time
equivalent students in grades K-8:

(i) For those enrolling
no students in grades 7 and 8, 1.76 certificated instructional staff units and
0.24 certificated administrative staff units for enrollment of not more than
five students, plus one‑twentieth of a certificated instructional staff
unit for each additional student enrolled; and

(ii) For those
enrolling students in grades 7 or 8, 1.68 certificated instructional staff
units and 0.32 certificated administrative staff units for enrollment of not
more than five students, plus one‑tenth of a certificated instructional
staff unit for each additional student enrolled;

(e) For specified
enrollments in districts enrolling more than twenty‑five but not more
than one hundred average annual full-time equivalent students in grades K-8,
and for small school plants within any school district which enroll more than
twenty‑five average annual full-time equivalent students in grades K-8
and have been judged to be remote and necessary by the state board of
education:

(i) For enrollment of
up to sixty annual average full-time equivalent students in grades K-6, 2.76
certificated instructional staff units and 0.24 certificated administrative
staff units; and

(ii) For enrollment of
up to twenty annual average full-time equivalent students in grades 7 and 8,
0.92 certificated instructional staff units and 0.08 certificated
administrative staff units;

(f) For districts
operating no more than two high schools with enrollments of less than three
hundred average annual full-time equivalent students, for enrollment in grades
9-12 in each such school, other than alternative schools:

(i) For remote and
necessary schools enrolling students in any grades 9-12 but no more than twenty‑five
average annual full-time equivalent students in grades K-12, four and one‑half
certificated instructional staff units and one‑quarter of a certificated
administrative staff unit;

(ii) For all other
small high schools under this subsection, nine certificated instructional staff
units and one‑half of a certificated administrative staff unit for the
first sixty average annual full time equivalent students, and additional staff
units based on a ratio of 0.8732 certificated instructional staff units and
0.1268 certificated administrative staff units per each additional forty‑three
and one‑half average annual full time equivalent students.

Units calculated under
(f)(ii) of this subsection shall be reduced by certificated staff units at the
rate of forty‑six certificated instructional staff units and four
certificated administrative staff units per thousand vocational full-time
equivalent students.

(g) For each nonhigh
school district having an enrollment of more than seventy annual average
full-time equivalent students and less than one hundred eighty students,
operating a grades K-8 program or a grades 1-8 program, an additional one-half
of a certificated instructional staff unit; and

(h) For each nonhigh
school district having an enrollment of more than fifty annual average
full-time equivalent students and less than one hundred eighty students,
operating a grades K-6 program or a grades 1-6 program, an additional one‑half
of a certificated instructional staff unit.

(3) Allocations for
classified salaries for the 2001-02 and 2002-03 school years shall be
calculated using formula‑generated classified staff units determined as
follows:

(a) For enrollments
generating certificated staff unit allocations under subsection (2)(d) through
(h) of this section, one classified staff unit for each three certificated
staff units allocated under such subsections;

(b) For all other
enrollment in grades K-12, including vocational full-time equivalent
enrollments, one classified staff unit for each sixty average annual full-time
equivalent students; and

(c) For each nonhigh
school district with an enrollment of more than fifty annual average full-time
equivalent students and less than one hundred eighty students, an additional
one‑half of a classified staff unit.

(4) Fringe benefit
allocations shall be calculated at a rate of ((11.27)) 10.76
percent in the 2001-02 school year and ((11.27)) 9.57 percent in
the 2002-03 school year for certificated salary allocations provided under
subsection (2) of this section, and a rate of ((12.92)) 12.73
percent in the 2001-02 school year and ((12.92)) 12.36 percent in
the 2002-03 school year for classified salary allocations provided under
subsection (3) of this section.

(5) Insurance benefit
allocations shall be calculated at the maintenance rate specified in section
504(3) of this act, based on the number of benefit units determined as follows:

(a) The number of
certificated staff units determined in subsection (2) of this section; and

(b) The number of
classified staff units determined in subsection (3) of this section multiplied
by 1.152. This factor is intended to adjust allocations so that, for the
purposes of distributing insurance benefits, full-time equivalent classified
employees may be calculated on the basis of 1440 hours of work per year, with
no individual employee counted as more than one full-time equivalent.

(6)(a) For
nonemployee-related costs associated with each certificated staff unit
allocated under subsection (2)(a), (b), and (d) through (h) of this section,
there shall be provided a maximum of $8,519 per certificated staff unit in the
2001-02 school year and a maximum of (($8,715)) $8,604 per
certificated staff unit in the 2002-03 school year.

(b) For
nonemployee-related costs associated with each vocational certificated staff
unit allocated under subsection (2)(c)(i)(A) of this section, there shall be
provided a maximum of $20,920 per certificated staff unit in the 2001-02 school
year and a maximum of (($21,401)) $21,129 per certificated staff
unit in the 2002-03 school year.

(c) For
nonemployee-related costs associated with each vocational certificated staff
unit allocated under subsection (2)(c)(i)(B) of this section, there shall be
provided a maximum of $16,233 per certificated staff unit in the 2001-02 school
year and a maximum of (($16,606)) $16,395 per certificated staff
unit in the 2002-03 school year.

(7) Allocations for
substitute costs for classroom teachers shall be distributed at a maintenance
rate of $494.34 for the 2001-02 and 2002-03 school years per allocated
classroom teachers exclusive of salary increase amounts provided in section 504
of this act. Solely for the purposes of this subsection, allocated classroom
teachers shall be equal to the number of certificated instructional staff units
allocated under subsection (2) of this section, multiplied by the ratio between
the number of actual basic education certificated teachers and the number of
actual basic education certificated instructional staff reported statewide for the
prior school year.

(8) Any school district
board of directors may petition the superintendent of public instruction by
submission of a resolution adopted in a public meeting to reduce or delay any
portion of its basic education allocation for any school year. The
superintendent of public instruction shall approve such reduction or delay if
it does not impair the district's financial condition. Any delay shall not be
for more than two school years. Any reduction or delay shall have no impact on
levy authority pursuant to RCW 84.52.0531 and local effort assistance pursuant
to chapter 28A.500 RCW.

(9) The superintendent
may distribute a maximum of (($6,510,000)) $4,404,000 outside the
basic education formula during fiscal years 2002 and 2003 as follows:

(a) For fire protection
for school districts located in a fire protection district as now or hereafter
established pursuant to chapter 52.04 RCW, a maximum of $480,000 may be
expended in fiscal year 2002 and a maximum of (($491,000)) $485,000
may be expended in fiscal year 2003;

(b) For summer
vocational programs at skills centers, a maximum of $2,098,000 may be expended
((each)) in fiscal year 2002;

(c) A maximum of (($343,000))
$341,000 may be expended for school district emergencies; and

(d) A maximum of
$500,000 per fiscal year may be expended for programs providing skills training
for secondary students who are enrolled in extended day school-to-work
programs, as approved by the superintendent of public instruction. The funds
shall be allocated at a rate not to exceed $500 per full-time equivalent
student enrolled in those programs.

(10) For purposes of
RCW 84.52.0531, the increase per full-time equivalent student in state basic
education appropriations provided under this act, including appropriations for
salary and benefits increases, is 2.5 percent from the 2000-01 school year to
the 2001-02 school year((, and 3.3 percent from the 2000-01 school year to
the 2002-03 school year)).

(11) For purposes of
RCW 84.52.0531, the increase in appropriations per full-time equivalent student
provided in this act, including appropriations for salary and benefits
increases, is 2.9 percent from the 2001-02 school year to the 2002-03 school
year.

(12) If two or
more school districts consolidate and each district was receiving additional
basic education formula staff units pursuant to subsection (2)(b) through (h)
of this section, the following shall apply:

(a) For three school
years following consolidation, the number of basic education formula staff
units shall not be less than the number of basic education formula staff units
received by the districts in the school year prior to the consolidation; and

(b) For the fourth
through eighth school years following consolidation, the difference between the
basic education formula staff units received by the districts for the school
year prior to consolidation and the basic education formula staff units after
consolidation pursuant to subsection (2)(a) through (h) of this section shall
be reduced in increments of twenty percent per year.

Sec. 503. 2001 2nd sp.s. c 7 s 503
(uncodified) is amended to read as follows:

FOR THE SUPERINTENDENT
OF PUBLIC INSTRUCTION‑-BASIC EDUCATION EMPLOYEE
COMPENSATION. (1) The following
calculations determine the salaries used in the general fund allocations for
certificated instructional, certificated administrative, and classified staff
units under section 502 of this act:

(a) Salary allocations
for certificated instructional staff units shall be determined for each
district by multiplying the district's certificated instructional total base
salary shown on LEAP Document 12E for the appropriate year, by the district's average
staff mix factor for basic education and special education certificated
instructional staff in that school year, computed using LEAP Document 1S; and

(b) Salary allocations
for certificated administrative staff units and classified staff units for each
district shall be based on the district's certificated administrative and
classified salary allocation amounts shown on LEAP Document 12E for the
appropriate year.

(2) For the purposes of
this section:

(a) "Basic
education certificated instructional staff" is defined as provided in RCW
28A.150.100 and "special education certificated staff" means staff
assigned to the state-supported special education program pursuant to chapter
28A.155 RCW in positions requiring a certificate;

(b) "LEAP Document
1S" means the computerized tabulation establishing staff mix factors for
certificated instructional staff according to education and years of
experience, as developed by the legislative evaluation and accountability
program committee on March 25, 1999, at 16:55 hours; and

(c) "LEAP Document
12E" means the computerized tabulation of 2001-02 and 2002-03 school year
salary allocations for certificated administrative staff and classified staff
and derived and total base salaries for certificated instructional staff as
developed by the legislative evaluation and accountability program committee on
((March 13, 2001, at 16:32 hours)) December 10, 2001, at 15:00 hours.

(3) Incremental fringe
benefit factors shall be applied to salary adjustments at a rate of ((10.63))
10.12 percent for ((school years)) the 2001-02 school
year and 8.93 percent for the 2002-03 school year for
certificated staff and ((9.42)) 9.23 percent for ((school
years)) the 2001-02 school year and 8.86 percent for the
2002-03 school year for classified staff.

(4)(a) Pursuant to RCW
28A.150.410, the following state‑wide salary allocation schedules for
certificated instructional staff are established for basic education salary
allocations:

K-12 Salary Schedule
for Certificated Instructional Staff

2001-02
School Year

Years of

Service BA
BA+15 BA+30 BA+45 BA+90

0 27,467 28,209 28,977 29,746 32,219

1 27,836 28,588 29,366 30,171 32,668

2 28,464 29,231 30,025 30,900 33,414

3 29,401 30,192 31,009 31,931 34,490

4 30,063 30,896 31,727 32,689 35,290

5 30,750 31,595 32,443 33,468 36,085

6 31,147 31,974 32,850 33,928 36,531

7 32,164 33,010 33,909 35,055 37,724

8 33,195 34,088 35,008 36,248 38,954

9 35,205 36,169 37,455 40,223

10 37,344 38,724 41,529

11 40,029 42,895

12 41,293 44,298

13 45,736

14 47,181

15 48,408

16 or more 49,376

Years of MA+90

Service BA+135 MA MA+45 or
PHD

0 33,811 32,931 35,403 36,996

1 34,252 33,297 35,793 37,377

2 35,030 33,995 36,509 38,124

3 36,177 35,027 37,585 39,273

4 37,007 35,755 38,355 40,072

5 37,853 36,503 39,121 40,889

6 38,308 36,904 39,508 41,285

7 39,569 38,031 40,700 42,546

8 40,867 39,225 41,930 43,843

9 42,201 40,430 43,200 45,177

10 43,572 41,700 44,505 46,549

11 44,979 43,005 45,872 47,956

12 46,446 44,362 47,275 49,422

13 47,947 45,766 48,712 50,923

14 49,505 47,212 50,251 52,481

15 50,792 48,439 51,557 53,846

16 or more 51,808 49,407 52,589 54,923

((K-12 Allocation Salary
Schedule For Certificated Instructional Staff

2002-03
School Year

Years of

Service BA BA+15 BA+30 BA+45 BA+90

0 28,318 29,083 29,875 30,668 33,217

1 28,699 29,473 30,276 31,106 33,680

2 29,345 30,137 30,955 31,857 34,449

3 30,312 31,127 31,970 32,920 35,559

4 30,994 31,854 32,710 33,702 36,383

5 31,703 32,574 33,448 34,505 37,203

6 32,112 32,964 33,868 34,979 37,663

7 33,160 34,033 34,959 36,141 38,893

8 34,223 35,145 36,092 37,372 40,161

9 36,295 37,289 38,616 41,470

10 38,501 39,923 42,815

11 41,269 44,225

12 42,572 45,671

13 47,153

14 48,642

15 49,907

16 or more 50,906

Years of MA+90

Service BA+135 MA MA+45 or
PHD

0 34,859 33,951 36,500 38,142

1 35,313 34,328 36,902 38,535

2 36,116 35,048 37,640 39,305

3 37,298 36,112 38,750 40,490

4 38,153 36,863 39,544 41,314

5 39,026 37,634 40,333 42,156

6 39,495 38,047 40,732 42,564

7 40,795 39,210 41,961 43,864

8 42,133 40,440 43,229 45,201

9 43,509 41,683 44,538 46,577

10 44,922 42,992 45,884 47,991

11 46,373 44,337 47,293 49,442

12 47,885 45,736 48,739 50,953

13 49,432 47,184 50,221 52,501

14 51,039 48,675 51,808 54,107

15 52,366 49,940 53,155 55,514

16 or more 53,413 50,938 54,218 56,624))

K-12 Salary Allocation
Schedule For Certificated Instructional Staff

2002-03
School Year

Years of

Service BA BA+15 BA+30 BA+45 BA+90

0 28,456 29,224 30,020 30,818 33,379

1 28,838 29,617 30,424 31,258 33,844

2 29,488 30,283 31,106 32,012 34,617

3 30,460 31,279 32,126 33,081 35,732

4 31,145 32,009 32,870 33,866 36,561

5 31,857 32,733 33,611 34,673 37,384

6 32,268 33,125 34,033 35,149 37,847

7 33,322 34,199 35,130 36,317 39,082

8 34,390 35,316 36,268 37,554 40,357

9 36,472 37,471 38,804 41,672

10 38,689 40,118 43,024

11 41,470 44,440

12 42,780 45,893

13 47,382

14 48,879

15 50,151

16 or more 51,154

Years of MA+90

Service BA+135 MA MA+45 or
PHD

0 35,028 34,116 36,678 38,328

1 35,485 34,496 37,082 38,723

2 36,292 35,219 37,823 39,497

3 37,479 36,288 38,938 40,687

4 38,339 37,043 39,737 41,515

5 39,216 37,818 40,529 42,361

6 39,688 38,233 40,930 42,771

7 40,994 39,401 42,166 44,077

8 42,338 40,637 43,440 45,421

9 43,721 41,886 44,755 46,804

10 45,141 43,201 46,108 48,225

11 46,599 44,554 47,524 49,682

12 48,118 45,959 48,977 51,201

13 49,673 47,414 50,466 52,757

14 51,287 48,912 52,060 54,371

15 52,621 50,183 53,414 55,785

16 or more 53,673 51,186 54,482 56,900

(b) As used in this
subsection, the column headings "BA+(N)" refer to the number of
credits earned since receiving the baccalaureate degree.

(c) For credits earned
after the baccalaureate degree but before the masters degree, any credits in
excess of forty‑five credits may be counted after the masters degree.
Thus, as used in this subsection, the column headings "MA+(N)" refer
to the total of:

(i) Credits earned
since receiving the masters degree; and

(ii) Any credits in
excess of forty‑five credits that were earned after the baccalaureate
degree but before the masters degree.

(5) For the purposes of
this section:

(a) "BA"
means a baccalaureate degree.

(b) "MA"
means a masters degree.

(c) "PHD"
means a doctorate degree.

(d) "Years of
service" shall be calculated under the same rules adopted by the
superintendent of public instruction.

(e) "Credits"
means college quarter hour credits and equivalent in-service credits computed
in accordance with RCW 28A.415.020 and 28A.415.023.

(6) No more than ninety
college quarter-hour credits received by any employee after the baccalaureate
degree may be used to determine compensation allocations under the state salary
allocation schedule and LEAP documents referenced in this act, or any
replacement schedules and documents, unless:

(a) The employee has a
masters degree; or

(b) The credits were
used in generating state salary allocations before January 1, 1992.

(7) The certificated
instructional staff base salary specified for each district in LEAP Document
12E and the salary schedules in subsection (4)(a) of this section include three
learning improvement days originally added in the 1999-00 school year. A school
district is eligible for the learning improvement day funds for school years
2001-02 and 2002-03, only if three learning improvement days have been added to
the 180-day contract year. If fewer than three days are added, the additional
learning improvement allocation shall be adjusted accordingly. The additional
days shall be for activities related to improving student learning consistent
with education reform implementation. The length of a learning improvement day
shall not be less than the length of a full day under the base contract. The
superintendent of public instruction shall ensure that school districts adhere
to the intent and purposes of this subsection.

(8) The salary
allocation schedules established in this section are for allocation purposes
only except as provided in RCW 28A.400.200(2).

Sec. 504. 2001 2nd sp.s. c 7 s 504
(uncodified) is amended to read as follows:

FOR THE SUPERINTENDENT
OF PUBLIC INSTRUCTION‑-FOR SCHOOL EMPLOYEE
COMPENSATION ADJUSTMENTS

General Fund‑-State
Appropriation (FY 2002).... $ ((124,130,000))

124,903,000

General Fund‑-State
Appropriation (FY 2003).... $ ((274,529,000))

257,207,000

TOTAL
APPROPRIATION................. $ ((398,659,000))

382,110,000

The appropriations in
this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations:

(1) (($318,024,000))
$330,517,000 is provided for a cost of living adjustment for state
formula staff units of 3.7 percent effective September 1, 2001, and ((another
salary adjustment)) 3.6 percent effective ((on)) September 1,
2002, ((in a percentage amount to be determined by the 2002 legislature))
consistent with the provisions of chapter 4, Laws of 2001 (Initiative Measure
No. 732). The appropriations include associated incremental fringe benefit
allocations at rates of ((10.63)) 10.12 percent for ((school
years)) the 2001-02 school year and 8.93 percent for the
2002-03 school year for certificated staff, and ((9.42)) 9.23
percent for ((school years)) the 2001-02 school year and 8.86
percent for the 2002-03 school year for classified staff.

(a) The appropriations
in this section include the increased portion of salaries and incremental
fringe benefits for all relevant state-funded school programs in part V of this
act, in accordance with chapter 4, Laws of 2001 (Initiative Measure No. 732).
Salary adjustments for state employees in the office of superintendent of
public instruction and the education reform program are provided in part VII of
this act. Increases for general apportionment (basic education) are based on
the salary allocation schedules and methodology in section 502 of this act.
Increases for special education result from increases in each district's basic
education allocation per student. Increases for educational service districts
and institutional education programs are determined by the superintendent of
public instruction using the methodology for general apportionment salaries and
benefits in section 502 of this act.

(b) The appropriations
in this section provide cost-of-living and incremental fringe benefit
allocations based on formula adjustments as follows:

School
Year

2001-02 2002-03

Pupil Transportation (per
weighted pupil mile) $ 0.77 $ ((1.44))

1.54

Highly Capable (per formula
student) $ ((8.75)) $ ((16.35))

8.71 17.31

Transitional Bilingual
Education (per eligible

bilingual student) $
((22.73)) $ ((42.48))

22.63 44.97

Learning Assistance (per
entitlement unit) $ ((11.23)) $ ((20.99))

11.19 22.32

Substitute Teacher
(allocation per teacher,

section 502(7)) $
18.29 $ ((34.18))

36.75

(2) This act
appropriates general fund‑-state funds for the purpose of providing the
annual salary cost-of-living increase required by section 2, chapter 4, Laws of
2001 (Initiative Measure No. 732) for teachers and other school district
employees in the state-funded salary base. For employees not included in the
state-funded salary base, the annual salary cost-of-living increase may be
provided by school districts from the federal funds appropriated in this act
and local revenues, including the adjusted levy base as provided in RCW
84.52.053 and section 502 of this act, and state discretionary funds provided
under this act.

(3) (($80,635,000))
$51,593,000 is provided for adjustments to insurance benefit
allocations. The maintenance rate for insurance benefit allocations is $427.73
per month for the 2001-02 and 2002-03 school years. The appropriations in this
section provide for a rate increase to $455.27 per month for the 2001-02 school
year and (($493.59)) $457.07 per month for the 2002-03 school
year at the following rates:

School
Year

2001-02 2002-03

Pupil Transportation (per
weighted pupil mile) $ 0.25 $ ((0.60))

0.27

Highly Capable (per formula
student) $ 1.74 $ ((4.18))

1.86

Transitional Bilingual
Education (per eligible

bilingual student) $
4.46 $ ((10.66))

4.75

Learning Assistance (per
entitlement unit) $ 3.51 $ ((8.38))

3.73

(4) The rates specified
in this section are subject to revision each year by the legislature.

Sec. 505. 2001 2nd sp.s. c 7 s 505
(uncodified) is amended to read as follows:

FOR THE SUPERINTENDENT
OF PUBLIC INSTRUCTION‑-FOR PUPIL TRANSPORTATION

General Fund‑-State
Appropriation (FY 2002).... $ ((193,198,000))

192,402,000

General Fund‑-State
Appropriation (FY 2003).... $ ((194,293,000))

193,317,000

TOTAL
APPROPRIATION ................. $ ((387,491,000))

385,719,000

The appropriations in
this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations:

(1) Each general fund
fiscal year appropriation includes such funds as are necessary to complete the
school year ending in the fiscal year and for prior fiscal year adjustments.

(2) A maximum of
$767,000 of this fiscal year 2002 appropriation and a maximum of (($785,000))
$775,000 of the fiscal year 2003 appropriation may be expended for
regional transportation coordinators and related activities. The
transportation coordinators shall ensure that data submitted by school
districts for state transportation funding shall, to the greatest extent
practical, reflect the actual transportation activity of each district.

(3) (($15,000)) $5,000
of the fiscal year 2002 appropriation and (($20,000)) $5,000 of
the fiscal year 2003 appropriation are provided solely for the transportation
of students enrolled in "choice" programs. Transportation shall be
limited to low-income students who are transferring to "choice"
programs solely for educational reasons.

(4) Allocations for
transportation of students shall be based on reimbursement rates of (($37.11))
$37.07 per weighted mile in the 2001-02 school year and (($37.38))
$37.12 per weighted mile in the 2002-03 school year exclusive of salary
and benefit adjustments provided in section 504 of this act. Allocations for
transportation of students transported more than one radius mile shall be based
on weighted miles as determined by superintendent of public instruction
multiplied by the per mile reimbursement rates for the school year pursuant to
the formulas adopted by the superintendent of public instruction. Allocations
for transportation of students living within one radius mile shall be based on
the number of enrolled students in grades kindergarten through five living
within one radius mile of their assigned school multiplied by the per mile
reimbursement rate for the school year multiplied by 1.29.

Sec. 506. 2001 2nd sp.s. c 7 s 507
(uncodified) is amended to read as follows:

FOR THE SUPERINTENDENT
OF PUBLIC INSTRUCTION‑-FOR SPECIAL EDUCATION
PROGRAMS

General Fund‑-State
Appropriation (FY 2002).... $ ((419,264,000))

421,065,000

General Fund‑-State
Appropriation (FY 2003).... $ ((420,644,000))

412,668,000

General Fund‑-Federal
Appropriation............. $.................................. 256,092,000

TOTAL
APPROPRIATION................. $ ((1,096,000,000))

1,089,825,000

The appropriations in
this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations:

(1) Funding for special
education programs is provided on an excess cost basis, pursuant to RCW
28A.150.390. School districts shall ensure that special education students as
a class receive their full share of the general apportionment allocation
accruing through sections 502 and 504 of this act. To the extent a school
district cannot provide an appropriate education for special education students
under chapter 28A.155 RCW through the general apportionment allocation, it
shall provide services through the special education excess cost allocation
funded in this section.

(2)(a) Effective with
the 2001-02 school year, the superintendent of public instruction shall change
the S-275 personnel reporting system and all related accounting requirements to
ensure that:

(i) Special education
students are basic education students first;

(ii) As a class,
special education students are entitled to the full basic education allocation;
and

(iii) Special education
students are basic education students for the entire school day.

(b) Effective with the
2001-02 school year, the S-275 and accounting changes shall supercede any prior
excess cost methodologies and shall be required of all school districts.

(3) Each general fund‑-state
fiscal year appropriation includes such funds as are necessary to complete the
school year ending in the fiscal year and for prior fiscal year adjustments.

(4) The superintendent
of public instruction shall distribute state funds to school districts based on
two categories: The optional birth through age two program for special
education eligible developmentally delayed infants and toddlers, and the
mandatory special education program for special education eligible students
ages three to twenty-one. A "special education eligible student"
means a student receiving specially designed instruction in accordance with a
properly formulated individualized education program.

(5)(a) For the 2001-02
and 2002-03 school years, the superintendent shall distribute state funds to
each district based on the sum of:

(i) A district's annual
average headcount enrollment of developmentally delayed infants and toddlers
ages birth through two, multiplied by the district's average basic education
allocation per full-time equivalent student, multiplied by 1.15; and

(ii) A district's
annual average full-time equivalent basic education enrollment multiplied by
the funded enrollment percent determined pursuant to subsection (6)(b) of this
section, multiplied by the district's average basic education allocation per
full-time equivalent student multiplied by 0.9309.

(b) For purposes of
this subsection, "average basic education allocation per full-time
equivalent student" for a district shall be based on the staffing ratios
required by RCW 28A.150.260 and shall not include enhancements, secondary
vocational education, or small schools.

(6) The definitions in
this subsection apply throughout this section.

(a) "Annual
average full-time equivalent basic education enrollment" means the
resident enrollment including students enrolled through choice (RCW
28A.225.225) and students from nonhigh districts (RCW 28A.225.210) and
excluding students residing in another district enrolled as part of an
interdistrict cooperative program (RCW 28A.225.250).

(b) "Enrollment
percent" means the district's resident special education annual average
enrollment, excluding the birth through age two enrollment, as a percent of the
district's annual average full-time equivalent basic education enrollment. For
the 2001-02 and the 2002-03 school years, each district's funded enrollment
percent shall be the lesser of the district's actual enrollment percent for the
school year for which the allocation is being determined or 12.7 percent for
the 2001-02 ((school year or 13.0 percent for the)) and 2002-03
school ((year)) years.

(7) At the request of
any interdistrict cooperative of at least 15 districts in which all excess cost
services for special education students of the districts are provided by the
cooperative, the maximum enrollment percent shall be 12.7 percent for the
2001-02 ((school year)) and ((13.0 percent for the)) 2002-03
school ((year)) years, and shall be calculated in the aggregate
rather than individual district units. For purposes of this subsection, the
average basic education allocation per full-time equivalent student shall be
calculated in the aggregate rather than individual district units.

(8) For fiscal year
2002, safety net funding shall be awarded by the state safety net committee
subject to the following conditions and limitations:

(a) A maximum of
(($12,000,000)) $9,400,000 of the general fund‑-state
appropriation for fiscal year 2002 ((and a maximum of $10,623,000 of the
general fund‑-state appropriation for fiscal year 2003 are)) is
provided as safety net funding for districts with demonstrated needs for state
special education funding beyond the amounts provided in subsection (5) of this
section((. Safety net funding shall be awarded by the state safety net
oversight committee.

(a))) and shall be awarded as follows:

(i) The safety
net oversight committee shall first consider the needs of districts adversely
affected by the 1995 change in the special education funding formula. Awards
shall be based on the lesser of the amount required to maintain the 1994-95
state special education excess cost allocation to the school district in
aggregate or on a dollar per funded student basis.

(((b))) (ii)
The committee shall then consider unmet needs for districts that can
convincingly demonstrate that all legitimate expenditures for special education
exceed all available revenues from state funding formulas. In the
determination of need, the committee shall also consider additional available revenues
from federal and local sources. Differences in program costs attributable to
district philosophy, service delivery choice, or accounting practices are not a
legitimate basis for safety net awards.

(((c))) (b)
To the extent necessary, $2,750,000 of the general fund‑-federal
appropriation shall be expended for safety net funding to meet the
extraordinary needs of one or more individual special education students. If
safety net awards to meet the extraordinary needs exceed $2,750,000 of the
general fund‑-federal appropriation, the superintendent shall expend all
available federal discretionary funds necessary to meet this need. General
fund‑-state funds shall not be expended for this purpose.

(9) For fiscal year
2003, safety net funding shall be awarded by the state safety net committee to
districts with demonstrated needs for state special education funding beyond
the amounts provided in subsection (5) of this section, subject to the
following conditions and limitations:

(a) A maximum of
$1,100,000 of the general fund‑-state appropriation for fiscal year 2003
is provided for awards to districts adversely affected by the 1995 change in
the special education funding formula. Awards shall be based on the lesser of
the amount required to maintain the 1994-95 state special education excess cost
allocation to the school district in aggregate or on a dollar per funded
student basis.

(b) A maximum of
$13,650,000 of the general fund‑-federal appropriation shall be awarded
to districts as follows:

(i) The committee
shall consider unmet needs for districts that can convincingly demonstrate that
all legitimate expenditures for special education exceed all available revenues
from state funding formulas. In the determination of need, the committee shall
also consider additional available revenues from federal and local sources.

(ii) The committee
shall then consider the extraordinary high cost needs of one or more individual
special education students.

(c) If safety net
awards under (b) of this subsection (9) exceed $13,650,000, the superintendent
shall expend all available federal discretionary funds necessary to meet these
needs. General fund‑-state funds shall not be expended for these
purposes.

(d) Differences in program
costs attributable to district philosophy, service delivery choice, or
accounting practices are not a legitimate basis for safety net awards.

(10) For fiscal
years 2002 and 2003:

(a) The maximum
allowable indirect cost for calculating safety net eligibility may not exceed
the federal restricted indirect cost rate for the district plus one percent.

(((d))) (b)
Safety net awards shall be adjusted based on the percent of potential medicaid
eligible students billed as calculated by the superintendent in accordance with
chapter 318, Laws of 1999.

(((e))) (c)
Safety net awards must be adjusted for any audit findings or exceptions related
to special education funding.

(((f))) (d)
The superintendent may expend up to $120,000 per year of the amounts provided
in this subsection to provide staff assistance to the committee in analyzing
applications for safety net funds received by the committee.

(((9))) (11)
The superintendent of public instruction may adopt such rules and procedures as
are necessary to administer the special education funding and safety net award
process. Prior to revising any standards, procedures, or rules, the
superintendent shall consult with the office of financial management and the
fiscal committees of the legislature.

(((10))) (12)
The safety net oversight committee appointed by the superintendent of public
instruction shall consist of:

(a) One staff from the
office of superintendent of public instruction;

(b) Staff of the office
of the state auditor;

(c) Staff of the office
of the financial management; and

(d) One or more
representatives from school districts or educational service districts
knowledgeable of special education programs and funding.

(((11) To the extent
necessary, $5,500,000 of the general fund‑-federal appropriation shall be
expended for safety net funding to meet the extraordinary needs of one or more
individual special education students. If safety net awards to meet the
extraordinary needs exceed $5,500,000 of the general fund‑-federal
appropriation, the superintendent shall expend all available federal
discretionary funds necessary to meet this need. General fund‑-state
funds shall not be expended for this purpose.

(12))) (13) A maximum of $678,000 may be
expended from the general fund‑-state appropriations to fund 5.43
full-time equivalent teachers and 2.1 full-time equivalent aides at children's
orthopedic hospital and medical center. This amount is in lieu of money
provided through the home and hospital allocation and the special education
program.

(((13))) (14)
$1,000,000 of the general fund‑-federal appropriation is provided for
projects to provide special education students with appropriate job and
independent living skills, including work experience where possible, to
facilitate their successful transition out of the public school system. The
funds provided by this subsection shall be from federal discretionary grants.

(((14))) (15)
The superintendent shall maintain the percentage of federal flow-through to
school districts at 85 percent for the 2001-02 school year. For the 2002-03
school year, the superintendent shall allocate federal funds as specified in
this section and shall adjust federal flow through accordingly. In
addition to other purposes, school districts may use increased federal funds
for high-cost students, for purchasing regional special education services from
educational service districts, and for staff development activities
particularly relating to inclusion issues.

(((15))) (16)
A maximum of $1,200,000 of the general fund‑-federal appropriation may be
expended by the superintendent for projects related to use of inclusion
strategies by school districts for provision of special education services.
The superintendent shall prepare an information database on laws, best practices,
examples of programs, and recommended resources. The information may be
disseminated in a variety of ways, including workshops and other staff
development activities.

(((16))) (17)
A school district may carry over from one year to the next year up to 10
percent of general fund‑-state funds allocated under this program;
however, carry over funds shall be expended in the special education program.

Sec. 507. 2001 2nd sp.s. c 7 s 508
(uncodified) is amended to read as follows:

FOR THE SUPERINTENDENT
OF PUBLIC INSTRUCTION‑-FOR TRAFFIC SAFETY EDUCATION
PROGRAMS

General Fund‑-State
Appropriation (FY 2002).... $ ((3,595,000))

3,765,000

General Fund‑-State
Appropriation (FY 2003).... $ ((2,588,000))

765,000

Public Safety and
Education Account

Appropriation.............................. $ 6,403,000

TOTAL
APPROPRIATION................. $ ((6,183,000))

10,933,000

(1) The general
fund‑-state appropriations in this section are subject to the
following conditions and limitations:

(((1))) (a)
The appropriations include such funds as are necessary to complete the school
year ending in each fiscal year and for prior fiscal year adjustments.

(((2))) (b)
A maximum of $253,000 of the fiscal year 2002 general fund appropriation and a
maximum of $254,000 of the fiscal year 2003 general fund appropriation may be
expended for regional traffic safety education coordinators.

(((3))) (c)
Allocations to provide tuition assistance for students eligible for free and
reduced price lunch who complete the program shall be a maximum of $203.97 per
eligible student in the 2001-02 ((and 2002-03)) school ((years)) year.

(2) The public
safety and education account appropriation in this section is subject to the
following conditions and limitations:

(a) The public
safety and education account appropriation shall lapse if House Bill No. 2573
(traffic safety education) is not enacted by June 30, 2002.

(b) If House Bill
No. 2573 is enacted by June 30, 2002, districts shall receive the following
allocations:

(i) The maximum
basic state allocation per student completing the program shall be $148.00 in
the 2002-03 school year.

(ii) Additional
allocations to provide tuition assistance for students eligible for free and
reduced price lunch who complete the program shall be a maximum of $71.00 per
eligible student in the 2002-03 school year.

Sec. 508. 2001 2nd sp.s. c 7 s 509
(uncodified) is amended to read as follows:

FOR THE SUPERINTENDENT
OF PUBLIC INSTRUCTION‑-FOR EDUCATIONAL SERVICE
DISTRICTS

General Fund‑-State
Appropriation (FY 2002).... $ ((4,768,000))

4,757,000

General Fund‑-State
Appropriation (FY 2003).... $ ((4,768,000))

4,732,000

TOTAL
APPROPRIATION................. $ ((9,536,000))

9,489,000

The appropriations in
this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations:

(1) The educational
service districts shall continue to furnish financial services required by the
superintendent of public instruction and RCW 28A.310.190 (3) and (4).

(2) $250,000 of the
general fund appropriation for fiscal year 2000 and $250,000 of the general
fund appropriation for fiscal year 2001 are provided solely for student
teaching centers as provided in RCW 28A.415.100.

(3) A maximum of
$250,000 of the fiscal year 2002 general fund appropriation and a maximum of
$250,000 of the fiscal year 2003 general fund appropriation are provided for
centers for the improvement of teaching pursuant to RCW 28A.415.010.

Sec. 509. 2001 2nd sp.s. c 7 s 510
(uncodified) is amended to read as follows:

FOR THE SUPERINTENDENT
OF PUBLIC INSTRUCTION‑-FOR LOCAL EFFORT ASSISTANCE

General Fund‑-State
Appropriation (FY 2002).... $ ((136,315,000))

140,932,000

General Fund‑-State
Appropriation (FY 2003).... $ ((148,329,000))

154,931,000

TOTAL
APPROPRIATION................. $ ((284,644,000))

295,863,000

The appropriations
in this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations:

Calendar year 2003
local effort assistance calculations under chapter 28A.500 RCW shall be
adjusted by multiplying allocations and maximum eligibility for each district
by 0.99 as authorized by House Bill No. 3011.

Sec. 510. 2001 2nd sp.s. c 7 s 511
(uncodified) is amended to read as follows:

FOR THE SUPERINTENDENT
OF PUBLIC INSTRUCTION‑-FOR INSTITUTIONAL EDUCATION
PROGRAMS

General Fund‑-State
Appropriation (FY 2002).... $ ((19,133,000))

19,073,000

General Fund‑-State
Appropriation (FY 2003).... $ ((19,115,000))

18,711,000

General Fund‑-Federal
Appropriation............. $.................................. 8,548,000

TOTAL
APPROPRIATION................. $ ((46,796,000))

46,332,000

The appropriations in
this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations:

(1) Each general fund‑-state
fiscal year appropriation includes such funds as are necessary to complete the
school year ending in the fiscal year and for prior fiscal year adjustments.

(2) State funding
provided under this section is based on salaries and other expenditures for a
220‑day school year. The superintendent of public instruction shall
monitor school district expenditure plans for institutional education programs
to ensure that districts plan for a full-time summer program.

(3) State funding for
each institutional education program shall be based on the institution's annual
average full-time equivalent student enrollment. Staffing ratios for each
category of institution shall remain the same as those funded in the 1995-97
biennium.

(4) The funded staffing
ratios for education programs for juveniles age 18 or less in department of
corrections facilities shall be the same as those provided in the 1997-99
biennium.

(5) $141,000 of the
general fund‑-state appropriation for fiscal year 2002 and $139,000 of
the general fund‑-state appropriation for fiscal year 2003 are provided
solely to maintain at least one certificated instructional staff and related
support services at an institution whenever the K-12 enrollment is not
sufficient to support one full-time equivalent certificated instructional staff
to furnish the educational program. The following types of institutions are
included: Residential programs under the department of social and health
services for developmentally disabled juveniles, programs for juveniles under
the department of corrections, and programs for juveniles under the juvenile
rehabilitation administration.

(6) Ten percent of the
funds allocated for each institution may be carried over from one year to the
next.

Sec. 511. 2001 2nd sp.s. c 7 s 512
(uncodified) is amended to read as follows:

FOR THE SUPERINTENDENT
OF PUBLIC INSTRUCTION‑-FOR PROGRAMS FOR HIGHLY
CAPABLE STUDENTS

General Fund‑-State
Appropriation (FY 2002).... $ ((6,443,000))

6,470,000

General Fund‑-State
Appropriation (FY 2003).... $ ((6,397,000))

6,413,000

TOTAL
APPROPRIATION................. $ ((12,840,000))

12,883,000

The appropriations in
this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations:

(1) Each general fund
fiscal year appropriation includes such funds as are necessary to complete the
school year ending in the fiscal year and for prior fiscal year adjustments.

(2) Allocations for
school district programs for highly capable students shall be distributed at a
maximum rate of (($328.10)) $327.22 per funded student for the
2001-02 school year and (($328.05)) $324.72 per funded student
for the 2002-03 school year, exclusive of salary and benefit adjustments
pursuant to section 504 of this act. The number of funded students shall be a
maximum of two percent of each district's full-time equivalent basic education
enrollment.

(3) $175,000 of the
fiscal year 2002 appropriation and $175,000 of the fiscal year 2003
appropriation are provided for the centrum program at Fort Worden state park.

(4) $93,000 of the
fiscal year 2002 appropriation and $93,000 of the fiscal year 2003
appropriation are provided for the Washington imagination network and future
problem-solving programs.

Sec. 512. 2001 2nd sp.s. c 7 s 513
(uncodified) is amended to read as follows:

FOR THE SUPERINTENDENT
OF PUBLIC INSTRUCTION‑-FOR MISCELLANEOUS
PURPOSES UNDER THE ELEMENTARY AND SECONDARY SCHOOL IMPROVEMENT ACT AND
THE NO CHILD LEFT BEHIND ACT

General Fund‑-Federal
Appropriation............. $.................................. ((288,166,000))

201,737,000

Sec. 513. 2001 2nd sp.s. c 7 s 514
(uncodified) is amended to read as follows:

FOR THE SUPERINTENDENT
OF PUBLIC INSTRUCTION‑-EDUCATION REFORM
PROGRAMS

General Fund‑-State
Appropriation (FY 2002).... $ ((35,882,000))

36,880,000

General Fund‑-State
Appropriation (FY 2003).... $ ((36,363,000))

26,635,000

General Fund‑-Federal
Appropriation............. $.................................. ((3,000,000))

60,571,000

TOTAL
APPROPRIATION................. $ ((75,245,000))

124,086,000

The appropriations in
this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations:

(1) $322,000 of the
general fund‑-state appropriation for fiscal year 2002 and $322,000 of
the general fund‑-state appropriation for fiscal year 2003 are provided
solely for the academic achievement and accountability commission.

(2) (($11,209,000))
$12,209,000 of the general fund‑-state appropriation for fiscal
year 2002, (($10,872,000)) $8,872,000 of the general fund‑-state
appropriation for fiscal year 2003, and (($3,000,000)) $4,000,000
of the general fund‑-federal appropriation are provided for development
and implementation of the Washington assessments of student learning. Up to
$689,000 of the appropriation may be expended for data analysis and data
management of test results.

(3) $1,095,000 of the
fiscal year 2002 general fund‑‑state appropriation and $1,095,000
of the fiscal year 2003 general fund‑‑state appropriation are
provided solely for training of paraprofessional classroom assistants and
certificated staff who work with classroom assistants as provided in RCW
28A.415.310.

(4) $4,695,000 of the
general fund‑-state appropriation for fiscal year 2002 and $4,695,000 of
the general fund‑‑state appropriation for fiscal year 2003 are
provided solely for mentor teacher assistance, including state support
activities, under RCW 28A.415.250 and 28A.415.260, and for a mentor academy.
Up to $200,000 of the amount in this subsection may be used each fiscal year to
operate a mentor academy to help districts provide effective training for peer
mentors. Funds for the teacher assistance program shall be allocated to school
districts based on the number of first year beginning teachers.

(a) A teacher
assistance program is a program that provides to a first year beginning teacher
peer mentor services that include but are not limited to:

(i) An orientation
process and individualized assistance to help beginning teachers who have been
hired prior to the start of the school year prepare for the start of a school
year;

(ii) The assignment of
a peer mentor whose responsibilities to the beginning teacher include but are
not limited to constructive feedback, the modeling of instructional strategies,
and frequent meetings and other forms of contact;

(iii) The provision by
peer mentors of strategies, training, and guidance in critical areas such as
classroom management, student discipline, curriculum management, instructional
skill, assessment, communication skills, and professional conduct. A district
may provide these components through a variety of means including one-on-one
contact and workshops offered by peer mentors to groups, including cohort
groups, of beginning teachers;

(iv) The provision of
release time, substitutes, mentor training in observation techniques, and other
measures for both peer mentors and beginning teachers, to allow each an
adequate amount of time to observe the other and to provide the classroom
experience that each needs to work together effectively;

(v) Assistance in the
incorporation of the essential academic learning requirements into
instructional plans and in the development of complex teaching strategies,
including strategies to raise the achievement of students with diverse learning
styles and backgrounds; and

(vi) Guidance and
assistance in the development and implementation of a professional growth
plan. The plan shall include a professional self-evaluation component and one
or more informal performance assessments. A peer mentor may not be involved in
any evaluation under RCW 28A.405.100 of a beginning teacher whom the peer
mentor has assisted through this program.

(b) In addition to the
services provided in (a) of this subsection, an eligible peer mentor program
shall include but is not limited to the following components:

(i) Strong
collaboration among the peer mentor, the beginning teacher's principal, and the
beginning teacher;

(ii) Stipends for peer
mentors and, at the option of a district, for beginning teachers. The stipends
shall not be deemed compensation for the purposes of salary lid compliance
under RCW 28A.400.200 and are not subject to the continuing contract provisions
of Title 28A RCW; and

(iii) To the extent
that resources are available for this purpose and that assistance to beginning
teachers is not adversely impacted, the program may serve second year and more
experienced teachers who request the assistance of peer mentors.

(5) $2,025,000 of the
general fund‑-state appropriation for fiscal year 2002 ((and
$2,025,000 of the general fund‑‑state appropriation for fiscal year
2003 are)) is provided for improving technology infrastructure,
monitoring and reporting on school district technology development, promoting
standards for school district technology, promoting statewide coordination and
planning for technology development, and providing regional educational
technology support centers, including state support activities, under chapter
28A.650 RCW. The superintendent of public instruction shall coordinate a
process to facilitate the evaluation and provision of online curriculum courses
to school districts which includes the following: Creation of a general
listing of the types of available online curriculum courses; a survey conducted
by each regional educational technology support center of school districts in its
region regarding the types of online curriculum courses desired by school
districts; a process to evaluate and recommend to school districts the best
online courses in terms of curriculum, student performance, and cost; and
assistance to school districts in procuring and providing the courses to
students.

(6) $3,600,000 of the
general fund‑-state appropriation for fiscal year 2002 and $3,600,000 of
the general fund‑‑state appropriation for fiscal year 2003 are
provided for grants to school districts to provide a continuum of care for
children and families to help children become ready to learn. Grant proposals
from school districts shall contain local plans designed collaboratively with
community service providers. If a continuum of care program exists in the area
in which the school district is located, the local plan shall provide for
coordination with existing programs to the greatest extent possible. Grant
funds shall be allocated pursuant to RCW 70.190.040.

(7) $2,500,000 of the
general fund‑-state appropriation for fiscal year 2002 and $2,500,000 of
the general fund‑‑state appropriation for fiscal year 2003 are
provided solely for the meals for kids program under RCW 28A.235.145 through
28A.235.155.

(8) $1,409,000 of the
general fund‑-state appropriation for fiscal year 2002 and $1,409,000 of
the general fund‑‑state appropriation for fiscal year 2003 are
provided solely for the leadership internship program for superintendents,
principals, and program administrators.

(9) $1,828,000 of the
general fund‑-state appropriation for fiscal year 2002 ((and
$1,828,000 of the general fund‑-state appropriation for fiscal year 2003
are)) is provided solely for the mathematics helping corps subject
to the following conditions and limitations:

(a) In order to increase
the availability and quality of technical mathematics assistance statewide, the
superintendent of public instruction shall employ mathematics school
improvement specialists to provide assistance to schools and districts. The
specialists shall be hired by and work under the direction of a statewide
school improvement coordinator. The mathematics improvement specialists shall
serve on a rotating basis from one to three years and shall not be permanent
employees of the superintendent of public instruction.

(b) The school
improvement specialists shall provide the following:

(i) Assistance to
schools to disaggregate student performance data and develop improvement plans
based on those data;

(ii) Consultation with
schools and districts concerning their performance on the Washington assessment
of student learning and other assessments emphasizing the performance on the
mathematics assessments;

(iii) Consultation
concerning curricula that aligns with the essential academic learning
requirements emphasizing the academic learning requirements for mathematics,
the Washington assessment of student learning, and meets the needs of diverse
learners;

(iv) Assistance in the
identification and implementation of research-based instructional practices in
mathematics;

(v) Staff training that
emphasizes effective instructional strategies and classroom-based assessment
for mathematics;

(vi) Assistance in
developing and implementing family and community involvement programs
emphasizing mathematics; and

(vii) Other assistance
to schools and school districts intended to improve student mathematics
learning.

(10) A maximum of
$500,000 of the general fund‑-state appropriation for fiscal year 2002
and a maximum of $500,000 of the general fund‑-state appropriation for fiscal
year 2003 are provided for summer accountability institutes offered by the
superintendent of public instruction and the academic achievement and
accountability commission. The institutes shall provide school district staff
with training in the analysis of student assessment data, information regarding
successful district and school teaching models, research on curriculum and
instruction, and planning tools for districts to improve instruction in
reading, mathematics, language arts, and guidance and counseling.

(11) $3,930,000 of the
general fund‑-state appropriation for fiscal year 2002 ((and
$3,829,000 of the general fund‑-state appropriation for fiscal year 2003
are)) is provided solely for the Washington reading corps subject to
the following conditions and limitations:

(a) Grants shall be
allocated to schools and school districts to implement proven, research-based
mentoring and tutoring programs in reading for low-performing students in
grades K-6. If the grant is made to a school district, the principals of
schools enrolling targeted students shall be consulted concerning design and
implementation of the program.

(b) The programs may be
implemented before, after, or during the regular school day, or on Saturdays,
summer, intercessions, or other vacation periods.

(c) Two or more schools
may combine their Washington reading corps programs.

(d) A program is
eligible for a grant if it meets the following conditions:

(i) The program employs
methods of teaching and student learning based on reliable reading/literacy
research and effective practices;

(ii) The program design
is comprehensive and includes instruction, on-going student assessment,
professional development, parental/community involvement, and program
management aligned with the school's reading curriculum;

(iii) It provides
quality professional development and training for teachers, staff, and
volunteer mentors and tutors;

(iv) It has measurable
goals for student reading aligned with the essential academic learning
requirements; and

(v) It contains an
evaluation component to determine the effectiveness of the program.

(e) Funding priority
shall be given to low-performing schools.

(f) Beginning and
end-of-program testing data shall be available to determine the effectiveness
of funded programs and practices. Common evaluative criteria across programs,
such as grade-level improvements shall be available for each reading corps
program. The superintendent of public instruction shall provide program
evaluations to the governor and the appropriate committees of the legislature.
Administrative and evaluation costs may be assessed from the annual
appropriation for the program.

(g) Grants provided
under this section may be used by schools and school districts for expenditures
from September 2001 through August 31, 2003.

(12) (($377,000))
$375,000 of the general fund‑-state appropriation for fiscal year
2002 and (($701,000)) $655,000 of the general fund‑-state
appropriation for fiscal year 2003 are provided solely for salary bonuses for
teachers who attain certification by the national board for professional
teaching standards.

(((b))) (a)
In the 2002-03 school year, teachers who have attained certification by the
national board in the 2000-01 school year or the 2001-02 school year or the
2002-03 school year shall receive an annual bonus not to exceed $3,500.

(((c))) (b)
The annual bonus shall be paid in a lump sum amount and shall not be included
in the definition of "earnable compensation" under RCW 41.32.010(10).

(((d))) (c)
It is the intent of the legislature that teachers achieving certification by
the national board of professional teaching standards will receive no more than
three annual bonus payments for attaining certification by the national board.

(13) $625,000 of the
general fund‑-state appropriation for fiscal year 2002 and $625,000 of
the general fund‑-state appropriation for fiscal year 2003 are provided
for a principal support program. The office of the superintendent of public
instruction may contract with an independent organization to administer the
program. The program shall include: (a) Development of an individualized
professional growth plan for a new principal or principal candidate; and (b)
participation of a mentor principal who works over a period of between one and
three years with the new principal or principal candidate to help him or her
build the skills identified as critical to the success of the professional
growth plan.

(14) $71,000 of the
general fund‑‑state appropriation for fiscal year 2002 and $71,000
of the general fund‑‑state appropriation for fiscal year 2003 are
provided solely for the second grade reading test. The funds shall be expended
for assessment training for new second grade teachers and replacement of
assessment materials.

(15) $384,000 of the
general fund‑-state appropriation for fiscal year 2002 and $384,000 of
the general fund‑-state appropriation for fiscal year 2003 are provided
for the superintendent to assist schools in implementing high academic
standards, aligning curriculum with these standards, and training teachers to
use assessments to improve student learning. Funds may also be used to
increase community and parental awareness of education reform.

(16) $130,000 of the
general fund‑-state appropriation for fiscal year 2002 and $130,000 of
the general fund‑-state appropriation for fiscal year 2003 are provided
for the development and posting of web-based instructional tools, assessment
data, and other information that assists schools and teachers implementing
higher academic standards.

(17) $1,000,000 of the
general fund‑-state appropriation for fiscal year 2002 and $1,800,000 of
the general fund‑-state appropriation for fiscal year 2003 are provided
solely to the office of the superintendent of public instruction for focused
assistance. The office of the superintendent of public instruction shall
conduct educational audits of low-performing schools and enter into performance
agreements between school districts and the office to implement the
recommendations of the audit and the community. Of the amounts provided,
$219,000 of the fiscal year 2002 appropriation and $207,000 of the fiscal year
2003 appropriation are provided to the office of the superintendent of public
instruction for the administrative duties arising under this subsection. Each
educational audit shall include recommendations for best practices and ways to
address identified needs and shall be presented to the community in a public
meeting to seek input on ways to implement the audit and its recommendations.

(18) $100,000 of the
general fund‑-state appropriation for fiscal year 2002 is provided solely
for grants to school districts to adopt or revise district-wide and
school-level plans to achieve performance improvement goals established under
RCW 28A.655.030, and to post a summary of the improvement plans on district
websites using a common format provided by the office of the superintendent of
public instruction.

(19) $100,000 of the
general fund‑-state appropriation for fiscal year 2002 is provided solely
for recognition plaques for schools that successfully met the fourth grade
reading improvement goal established under RCW 28A.655.050.

(20) $46,554,000 of
the general fund‑-federal appropriation is provided for preparing,
training, and recruiting high quality teachers and principals under Title II of
the no child left behind act.

(21) $6,591,000 of
the general fund‑-federal appropriation is provided for the reading first
program under Title I of the no child left behind act.

(22) $3,426,000 of
the general fund‑-federal appropriation is provided for the development
of state assessments as required under Title VI of the no child left behind
act.

Sec. 514. 2001 2nd sp.s. c 7 s 515
(uncodified) is amended to read as follows:

FOR THE SUPERINTENDENT
OF PUBLIC INSTRUCTION‑-FOR TRANSITIONAL BILINGUAL
PROGRAMS

General Fund‑-State
Appropriation (FY 2002).... $ ((43,044,000))

42,767,000

General Fund‑-State
Appropriation (FY 2003).... $ ((45,171,000))

44,897,000

General Fund‑-Federal
Appropriation............. $.................................. 20,280,000

TOTAL APPROPRIATION................. $ ((88,215,000))

107,944,000

(1) The general
fund‑-state appropriations in this section are subject to the
following conditions and limitations:

(((1))) (a)
Each general fund fiscal year appropriation includes such funds as are
necessary to complete the school year ending in the fiscal year and for prior
fiscal year adjustments.

(((2))) (b)
The superintendent shall distribute a maximum of (($687.19)) $684.36
per eligible bilingual student in the 2001-02 school year and (($687.19))
$677.75 in the 2002-03 school year, exclusive of salary and benefit
adjustments provided in section 504 of this act.

(((3))) (c)
The superintendent may withhold up to $295,000 in school year 2001-02 and up to
(($268,000)) $700,000 in school year 2002-03, and adjust the per
eligible pupil rates in subsection (2) of this section accordingly, for the
central provision of assessments as provided in section 2(1) and (2) of
Engrossed Second Substitute House Bill No. 2025.

(((4))) (d)
$70,000 of the amounts appropriated in this section are provided solely to
develop a system for the tracking of current and former transitional bilingual
program students.

(((5))) (e)
Sufficient funding is provided to implement Engrossed Second Substitute House
Bill No. 2025 (schools/bilingual instruction).

(2) The general fund‑-federal
appropriation in this section is provided for English language acquisition and
language enhancement grants under Title III of the no child left behind act.

Sec. 515. 2001 2nd sp.s. c 7 s 516
(uncodified) is amended to read as follows:

FOR THE SUPERINTENDENT
OF PUBLIC INSTRUCTION‑-FOR THE LEARNING ASSISTANCE
PROGRAM

General Fund‑-State
Appropriation (FY 2002).... $ ((70,593,000))

71,342,000

General Fund‑-State
Appropriation (FY 2003).... $ ((68,817,000))

64,701,000

General Fund‑-Federal
Appropriation............. $.................................. 130,876,000

TOTAL
APPROPRIATION................. $ ((139,410,000))

266,919,000

(1) The general
fund‑-state appropriations in this section are subject to the
following conditions and limitations:

(((1))) (a)
Each general fund‑-state fiscal year appropriation includes such
funds as are necessary to complete the school year ending in the fiscal year
and for prior fiscal year adjustments.

(((2))) (b)
Funding for school district learning assistance programs shall be allocated at
maximum rates of (($408.38)) $407.39 per funded unit for the
2001-02 school year and (($409.41)) $405.64 per funded unit for
the 2002-03 school year exclusive of salary and benefit adjustments provided
under section 504 of this act.

(((3))) (c)
For purposes of this section, "test results" refers to the district
results from the norm-referenced test administered in the specified grade
level. The norm-referenced test results used for the third and sixth grade
calculations shall be consistent with the third and sixth grade tests required
under RCW 28A.230.190 and 28A.230.193.

(((4))) (d)
A school district's funded units for the 2001-02 and 2002-03 school years shall
be the sum of the following:

(((a))) (i)
The district's full-time equivalent enrollment in grades K-6, multiplied by the
5-year average 4th grade lowest quartile test results as adjusted for funding
purposes in the school years prior to 1999-2000, multiplied by 0.92 for the
2001-02 school year and by 0.82 for the 2002-03 school year. As the 3rd
grade test becomes available, it shall be phased into the 5-year average on a
1-year lag; and

(((b))) (ii)
The district's full-time equivalent enrollment in grades 7-9, multiplied by the
5-year average 8th grade lowest quartile test results as adjusted for funding
purposes in the school years prior to 1999-2000, multiplied by 0.92 for the
2001-02 school year and by 0.82 for the 2002-03 school year. As the 6th
grade test becomes available, it shall be phased into the 5-year average for
these grades on a 1-year lag; and

(((c))) (iii)
The district's full-time equivalent enrollment in grades 10-11 multiplied by the
5-year average 11th grade lowest quartile test results, multiplied by 0.92 for
the 2001-02 school year and by 0.82 for the 2002-03 school year. As the
9th grade test becomes available, it shall be phased into the 5-year average
for these grades on a 1-year lag; and

(((d))) (iv)
If, in the prior school year, the district's percentage of October headcount
enrollment in grades K-12 eligible for free and reduced price lunch exceeded
the state average, subtract the state average percentage of students eligible
for free and reduced price lunch from the district's percentage and multiply
the result by the district's K-12 annual average full-time equivalent
enrollment for the current school year multiplied by 22.3 percent.

(((5))) (e)
For the 2002-03 school year, in addition to the amounts allocated under (d)(i)
through (iv) of this subsection, the superintendent shall provide additional
amounts calculated as follows:

(i) For school
districts receiving less than a 3.0 percent increase in federal Title I Part A
funds from the 2001-02 school year to the 2002-03 school year:

(A) Calculate the
allocation under (d)(i) through (iii) of this subsection;

(B) Calculate the
allocation under (d)(i) through (iii) of this subsection using a multiplier of
0.92 rather than 0.82;

(C) Provide the
difference between the results of (e)(i)(A) and (i)(B) of this subsection.

(ii) For school
districts receiving more than a 3.0 percent increase in federal Title I Part A
funds from the 2001-02 school year to the 2002-03 school year:

(A) Calculate the
amount of the increase in Title I Part A from the 2001-02 school year to the
2002-03 school year that is greater than 3 percent;

(B) Calculate the
allocation under (d)(i) through (iii) of this subsection;

(C) Calculate the
allocation under (d)(i) through (iii) of this subsection using a multiplier of
0.92 rather than 0.82;

(D) Subtract
(e)(ii)(C) from (ii)(B) of this subsection;

(E) If the result of
(e)(ii)(D) of this subsection is greater than the result of (e)(ii)(A) of this
subsection, then provide the difference between (e)(ii)(D) and (ii)(A) of this
subsection.

(f) School
districts may carry over from one year to the next up to 10 percent of general
fund‑-state funds allocated under this program; however, carryover
funds shall be expended for the learning assistance program.

(2) The general fund‑-federal
appropriation is provided for Title I Part A allocations under the no child
left behind act of 2001.

Sec. 516. 2001 2nd sp.s. c 7 s 517
(uncodified) is amended to read as follows:

FOR THE SUPERINTENDENT
OF PUBLIC INSTRUCTION‑-LOCAL ENHANCEMENT FUNDS

General Fund‑-State
Appropriation (FY 2002).... $ ((19,515,000))

19,663,000

General Fund‑-State
Appropriation (FY 2003).... $ ((17,516,000))

3,541,000

TOTAL
APPROPRIATION................. $ ((37,031,000))

23,204,000

The appropriations in
this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations:

(1) Each general fund
fiscal year appropriation includes such funds as are necessary to complete the
school year ending in the fiscal year and for prior fiscal year adjustments.

(2) Funds are provided
for local education program enhancements to meet educational needs as
identified by the school district, including alternative education programs.

(3) Allocations for the
2001-02 school year shall be at a maximum annual rate of $18.48 per full-time
equivalent student ((and $18.48 per full-time equivalent student for the
2002-03 school year)). Allocations shall be made on the monthly
apportionment payment schedule provided in RCW 28A.510.250 and shall be based
on school district annual average full-time equivalent enrollment in grades
kindergarten through twelve: PROVIDED, That for school districts enrolling not
more than one hundred average annual full-time equivalent students, and for
small school plants within any school district designated as remote and
necessary schools, the allocations shall be as follows:

(a) Enrollment of not
more than sixty average annual full-time equivalent students in grades
kindergarten through six shall generate funding based on sixty full-time
equivalent students;

(b) Enrollment of not
more than twenty average annual full-time equivalent students in grades seven
and eight shall generate funding based on twenty full-time equivalent students;
and

(c) Enrollment of not
more than sixty average annual full-time equivalent students in grades nine
through twelve shall generate funding based on sixty full-time equivalent
students.

(4) Funding provided
pursuant to this section does not fall within the definition of basic education
for purposes of Article IX of the state Constitution and the state's funding
duty thereunder.

(5) The superintendent
shall not allocate up to one-fourth of a district's funds under this section
if:

(a) The district is not
maximizing federal matching funds for medical services provided through special
education programs, pursuant to RCW 74.09.5241 through 74.09.5256 (Title XIX
funding); or

(b) The district is not
in compliance in filing truancy petitions as required under chapter 312, Laws
of 1995 and RCW 28A.225.030.

Sec. 517. 2001 2nd sp.s. c 7 s 519
(uncodified) is amended to read as follows:

FOR THE SUPERINTENDENT
OF PUBLIC INSTRUCTION‑-FOR STUDENT ACHIEVEMENT
PROGRAM

Student Achievement Fund‑-State

Appropriation (FY 2002).................... $ ((184,232,000))

180,837,000

Student Achievement Fund‑-State

Appropriation (FY 2003).................... $ ((209,068,000))

210,312,000

TOTAL
APPROPRIATION................. $ ((393,300,000))

391,149,000

The appropriations in
this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations:

(1) The appropriation
is allocated for the following uses as specified in chapter 28A.505 RCW as
amended by chapter 3, Laws of 2001 (Initiative Measure No. 728):

(a) To reduce class
size by hiring certificated elementary classroom teachers in grades K-4 and
paying nonemployee-related costs associated with those new teachers;

(b) To make selected
reductions in class size in grades 5-12, such as small high school writing
classes;

(c) To provide extended
learning opportunities to improve student academic achievement in grades K-12,
including, but not limited to, extended school year, extended school day,
before-and-after-school programs, special tutoring programs, weekend school
programs, summer school, and all-day kindergarten;

(d) To provide
additional professional development for educators including additional paid
time for curriculum and lesson redesign and alignment, training to ensure that
instruction is aligned with state standards and student needs, reimbursement
for higher education costs related to enhancing teaching skills and knowledge,
and mentoring programs to match teachers with skilled, master teachers. The
funding shall not be used for salary increases or additional compensation for
existing teaching duties, but may be used for extended year and extend day
teaching contracts;

(e) To provide early
assistance for children who need prekindergarten support in order to be
successful in school; or

(f) To provide
improvements or additions to school building facilities which are directly
related to the class size reductions and extended learning opportunities under
(a) through (c) of this subsection.

(2) Funding for school
district student achievement programs shall be allocated at a maximum rate of
(($193.92)) $190.19 per FTE student for the 2001-02 school year
and (($220.59)) $219.84 per FTE student for the 2002-03 school
year. For the purposes of this section and in accordance with ((RCW 84.52.‑‑‑
(section 5 of Initiative Measure No. 728))) RCW 84.52.068, FTE
student refers to the annual average full-time equivalent enrollment of the
school district in grades kindergarten through twelve for the prior school
year.

(3) The office of the
superintendent of public instruction shall distribute ten percent of the annual
allocation to districts each month for the months of September through June.

Sec. 518. 2001 2nd sp.s. c 7 s 521
(uncodified) is amended to read as follows:

FOR THE STATE BOARD OF EDUCATION

Education Savings Account‑-State

Appropriation.............................. $ ((36,720,000))

36,656,000

Education Construction
Account‑-State

Appropriation.............................. $ 154,500,000

TOTAL
APPROPRIATION................. $ ((191,220,000))

191,156,000

The appropriations in
this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations:

(1) (($18,000,000))
$17,936,000 in fiscal year 2002 and $18,720,000 in fiscal year 2003 of
the education savings account appropriation shall be deposited in the common
school construction account.

(2)
$154,500,000 of the education construction account appropriation shall be
deposited in the common school construction account.

(End
of part)

PART
VI

HIGHER EDUCATION

Sec. 601. 2001 2nd sp.s. c 7 s 601
(uncodified) is amended to read as follows:

The appropriations in
sections 603 through 609 of this act are subject to the following conditions
and limitations:

(1)
"Institutions" means the institutions of higher education receiving
appropriations under sections 603 through 609 of this act.

(2)(a) The salary
increases provided or referenced in this subsection shall be the only allowable
salary increases provided at institutions of higher education, excluding
increases associated with normally occurring promotions and increases related
to faculty and professional staff retention, and excluding increases associated
with employees under the jurisdiction of chapter 41.56 RCW pursuant to the
provisions of RCW 28B.16.015 and 28B.50.874(1).

(b) Each institution of
higher education shall provide to each classified staff employee as defined by
the office of financial management, except for classified staff at the
technical colleges, a salary increase of 3.7 percent on July 1, 2001, and 2.0
percent on September 1, 2002. The technical colleges shall provide to
classified employees under chapter 41.56 RCW an average salary increase of 3.7
percent on July 1, 2001, and 3.6 percent on July 1, 2002. ((Funds
are also provided for salary increases for all classified employees on July 1,
2002, in a percentage amount to be determined by the 2002 legislature and, in
the case of technical college classified staff, consistent with the provisions
of Initiative 732.))

(c) Each institution of
higher education, except for the community and technical colleges, shall
provide to state-funded instructional and research faculty, exempt professional
staff, academic administrators, academic librarians, counselors, teaching and
research assistants as classified by the office of financial management, and
all other state-funded nonclassified staff, including those employees under RCW
28B.16.015, an average salary increase of 3.7 percent on July 1, 2001, and
2.0 percent on September 1, 2002. ((Funds are also provided for salary
increases for these employee groups on July 1, 2002, in a percentage amount to
be determined by the 2002 legislature.)) Each institution may provide the
same average increases to similar positions that are not state-funded.

(d) The community and
technical colleges shall provide to academic employees, ((exempt
professional staff, and academic administrators)) as defined in RCW
28B.52.020 pursuant to the provisions of Initiative Measure No. 732, an
average salary increase of 3.7 percent on July 1, 2001, and 3.6 percent on
July 1, 2002. ((Funds are also provided for salary increases for these
groups on July 1, 2002, in a percentage amount to be determined by the 2002
legislature and, in the case of community college academic employees and
technical college employees, consistent with the provisions of Initiative 732.))

(e) For employees under
the jurisdiction of chapter 41.56 RCW pursuant to the provisions of RCW
28B.16.015 and 28B.50.874(1), distribution of the salary increases will be in
accordance with the applicable collective bargaining agreement. However, an
increase shall not be provided to any classified employee whose salary is above
the approved salary range maximum for the class to which the employee's
position is allocated.

(f) Each institution of
higher education receiving appropriations under sections 604 through 609 of
this act may provide additional salary increases to instructional and research
faculty, exempt professional staff, academic administrators, academic
librarians, counselors, teaching and research assistants, as classified by the
office of financial management, and all other nonclassified staff, but not
including employees under RCW 28B.16.015. Any salary increase granted under
the authority of this subsection (2)(f) shall not be included in an
institution's salary base. It is the intent of the legislature that general
fund‑-state support for an institution shall not increase during the
current or any future biennium as a result of any salary increases authorized
under this subsection (2)(f).

(g) To collect
consistent data for use by the legislature, the office of financial management,
and other state agencies for policy and planning purposes, institutions of
higher education shall report personnel data to be used in the department of
personnel's human resource data warehouse in compliance with uniform reporting
procedures established by the department of personnel.

(h) Specific salary
increases authorized in sections 603 through 609 of this act are in addition to
any salary increase provided in this subsection.

(3) The tuition fees,
as defined in chapter 28B.15 RCW, charged to full-time students at the state's
institutions of higher education for the 2001-02 and 2002-03 academic years,
other than the summer term, may be adjusted by the governing boards of the
state universities, regional universities, The Evergreen State College, and the
state board for community and technical colleges as provided in this
subsection.

(a) For the 2001-02
academic year, the governing boards and the state board may implement an
increase no greater than six and seven-tenths percent over tuition fees charged
to full-time students for the 2000-01 academic year.

(b)(i) For the
2002-03 academic year, the governing boards ((and the state board may
implement an increase no greater than six and one-tenth percent over the
tuition fees charged to full-time students for the 2001-02 academic year.))
of the state universities may implement an increase no greater than sixteen
percent over tuition fees charged to full-time resident undergraduate students
for the 2001-02 academic year.

(ii) For the 2002-03
academic year, the governing boards of the regional universities and The
Evergreen State College may implement an increase no greater than fourteen percent
over tuition fees charged to full-time resident undergraduate students for the
2001-02 academic year.

(iii) For the
2002-03 academic year, the state board for community and technical colleges may
implement an increase no greater than twelve percent over tuition fees charged
to full-time resident undergraduate students for the 2001-02 academic year.

(iv) Pursuant to RCW
43.135.055, for the 2002-03 academic year, the governing boards of the state
universities, the regional universities, The Evergreen State College, and the
state board for community and technical colleges may implement an increase in
excess of the fiscal growth factor over tuition fees charged to nonresident
undergraduate students for the 2001-02 academic year.

(c) For the 2001-02
academic year, the governing boards may implement an increase for law and
graduate business programs no greater than twelve percent over tuition fees
charged to law and graduate business students for the 2000-01 academic year,
except as provided in (e) of this subsection.

(d) Pursuant to RCW
43.135.055, for the 2002-03 academic year, the governing boards ((may
implement an increase for law and graduate business programs no greater than
twelve percent over tuition fees charged to law and graduate business students
for the 2001-02 academic year, except as provided in (f) of this subsection.))
of the state universities, the regional universities, and The Evergreen
State College may implement an increase in excess of the fiscal growth factor
over tuition fees charged to graduate, law, and first professional students for
the 2001-02 academic year.

(e) For the 2001-02
academic year, the governing boards of the University of Washington may
implement an increase for graduate business programs no greater than 15 percent
over tuition fees charged to graduate business students for the 2000-01
academic year.

(f) ((For the
2002-03 academic year, the governing boards of the University of Washington may
implement an increase for graduate business programs no greater than 20 percent
over tuition fees charged to graduate business students for the 2001-02
academic year.

(g))) (i) For the 2001-02 ((and the
2002-03)) academic year((s)), the state board for community and
technical colleges may increase tuition fees differentially based on
student credit hour load, but the average percentage increase for
students taking fifteen or fewer credits shall not exceed ((the limits in
subsection (3)(a) and (b) of this section)) twelve percent.

(ii) For the 2002-03
academic year, the state board for community and technical colleges may
increase tuition fees differentially at their discretion.

(((h))) (g)
For the 2001-03 biennium, the governing boards and the state board may adjust
full-time operating fees for factors that may include time of day and day of
week, as well as delivery method and campus, to encourage full use of the
state's educational facilities and resources.

(((i))) (h)
The tuition increases adopted under (a), (b), (g), and (h) of this subsection
need not apply uniformly across student categories as defined in chapter 28B.15
RCW so long as the increase for each student category does not exceed the
percentages specified in this subsection.

(4) ((In addition to
waivers granted under the authority of RCW 28B.15.910, the governing boards and
the state board may waive all or a portion of the operating fees for any
student.)) For the remainder of the 2001-03 biennium, the governing
boards and the state board are encouraged to reduce waiver activity in
recognition of the need to retain available resources to preserve the
educational quality of higher education institutions. State general fund
appropriations shall not be provided to replace tuition and fee revenue
foregone as a result of waivers granted under ((this subsection)) authority
of RCW 28B.15.915.

(5) Pursuant to RCW ((43.15.055))
43.135.055, institutions of higher education receiving appropriations
under sections 603 through 609 of this act are authorized to increase summer
term tuition in excess of the fiscal growth factor during the 2001-03
biennium. Tuition levels increased pursuant to this subsection shall not
exceed the per credit hour rate calculated from the academic year tuition
levels adopted under this act.

(6) Community colleges
may increase services and activities fee charges in excess of the fiscal growth
factor up to the maximum level authorized by the state board for community and
technical colleges.

(7) Each institution
receiving appropriations under sections 604 through 609 of this act shall
submit a biennial plan to achieve measurable and specific improvements each
academic year as part of a continuing effort to make meaningful and substantial
progress towards the achievement of long-term performance goals. The plans, to
be prepared at the direction of the higher education coordinating board, shall
be submitted by August 15, 2001. The higher education coordinating board shall
set biennial performance targets for each institution and shall review actual
achievements annually. Institutions shall track their actual performance on
the statewide measures as well as faculty productivity, the goals and targets
for which may be unique to each institution. A report on progress towards
statewide and institution-specific goals, with recommendations for the ensuing
biennium, shall be submitted to the fiscal and higher education committees of
the legislature by November 15, 2003.

(8) The state board for
community and technical colleges shall develop a biennial plan to achieve
measurable and specific improvements each academic year as part of a continuing
effort to make meaningful and substantial progress to achieve long-term
performance goals. The board shall set biennial performance targets for each
college or district, where appropriate, and shall review actual achievements
annually. Colleges shall track their actual performance on the statewide
measures. A report on progress towards the statewide goals, with
recommendations for the ensuing biennium, shall be submitted to the fiscal and
higher education committees of the legislature by November 15, 2003.

Sec. 602. 2001 2nd sp.s. c 7 s 602
(uncodified) is amended to read as follows:

The appropriations in
sections 603 through 609 of this act provide state general fund support for
full-time equivalent student enrollments at each institution of higher
education. Listed below are the annual full-time equivalent student
enrollments by institutions assumed in this act.

2001-2002 2002-2003

Annual Annual

Average Average

University of Washington

Main campus 32,321 32,427

Bothell branch 1,169 1,235

Tacoma branch 1,330 1,484

Washington State University

Main campus 17,332 17,332

Spokane branch 551 593

Tri-Cities branch 616 616

Vancouver branch 1,071 1,153

Central Washington
University 7,470 7,470

Eastern Washington
University 7,933 8,017

The Evergreen State College 3,754 3,837

Western Washington
University 10,976 11,126

State Board for Community
and

Technical Colleges 125,082 ((126,902))

128,402

When allocating newly
budgeted enrollments, each institution of higher education shall give priority
to high demand fields, including but not limited to technology, health
professions, and education. At the end of each fiscal year, each institution
of higher education and the state board for community and technical colleges
shall submit a report to the higher education coordinating board detailing how
newly budgeted enrollments have been allocated.

Sec. 603. 2001 2nd sp.s. c 7 s 603
(uncodified) is amended to read as follows:

FOR THE STATE BOARD FOR
COMMUNITY AND TECHNICAL COLLEGES

General Fund‑-State
Appropriation (FY 2002).... $ ((514,399,000))

514,141,000

General Fund‑-State
Appropriation (FY 2003).... $ ((543,731,000))

533,088,000

General Fund‑-Federal
Appropriation............. $.................................. 11,404,000

Administrative
Contingency Account‑-State

Appropriation.............................. $ 2,600,000

Education Savings Account‑-State

Appropriation.............................. $ 4,500,000

TOTAL
APPROPRIATION................. $ ((1,074,034,000))

1,065,733,000

The appropriations in
this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations:

(1) The technical
colleges may increase tuition and fees in excess of the fiscal growth factor to
conform with the percentage increase in community college operating fees.

(2) $2,475,000 of the
general fund‑-state appropriation for fiscal year 2002 and $5,025,000 of
the general fund‑-state appropriation for fiscal year 2003 are provided
solely to increase salaries and related benefits for part-time faculty. The board
shall report by December 1 of each fiscal year to the office of financial
management and legislative fiscal and higher education committees on (a) the
distribution of state funds; (b) wage adjustments for part-time faculty; and
(c) progress to achieve the long-term performance targets for each district,
with respect to use of part-time faculty, pursuant to the faculty mix study
conducted under section 603, chapter 309, Laws of 1999.

(3) $1,155,000 of the
general fund‑-state appropriation for fiscal year 2002 and $2,345,000 of
the general fund‑-state appropriation for fiscal year 2003 are provided
solely for faculty salary increments and associated benefits and may be used in
combination with salary and benefit savings from faculty turnover to provide faculty
salary increments and associated benefits. To the extent general salary
increase funding is used to pay faculty increments, the general salary increase
shall be reduced by the same amount.

(4) $1,000,000 of the
general fund‑-state appropriation for fiscal year 2002 and $1,000,000 of
the general fund‑-state appropriation for fiscal year 2003 are provided
for a program to fund the start-up of new community and technical college
programs in rural counties as defined under RCW 43.160.020(12) and in communities
impacted by business closures and job reductions. Successful proposals must
respond to local economic development strategies and must include a plan to
continue programs developed with this funding.

(5) $326,000 of the
general fund‑-state appropriation for fiscal year 2002 and $640,000 of
the general fund‑-state appropriation for fiscal year 2003 are provided
solely for allocation to twelve college districts identified in (a) through (l)
of this subsection to prepare students for transfer to the state technology
institute at the Tacoma branch campus of the University of Washington. The
appropriations in this section are intended to supplement, not supplant,
general enrollment allocations by the board to the districts under (a) through
(l) of this subsection:

(a) Bates Technical
College;

(b) Bellevue Community
College;

(c) Centralia Community
College;

(d) Clover Park
Community College;

(e) Grays Harbor
Community College;

(f) Green River
Community College;

(g) Highline Community
College;

(h) Tacoma Community
College;

(i) Olympic Community
College;

(j) Pierce District;

(k) Seattle District;
and

(l) South Puget Sound
Community College.

(6) $28,761,000 of the
general fund‑-state appropriation for fiscal year 2002 and (($28,761,000))
$35,161,000 of the general fund‑-state appropriation for fiscal
year 2003 are provided solely as special funds for training and related support
services, including financial aid, as specified in chapter 226, Laws of 1993
(employment and training for unemployed workers).

(a) Funding is provided
to support up to ((7,200)) 8,700 full-time equivalent students in
each fiscal year.

(b) In directing these
resources during the 2001-03 biennium, the state board for community and
technical colleges shall give considerable attention to the permanent
dislocation of workers from industries facing rapidly rising energy costs, such
as direct service industries.

(7) $1,000,000 of the
general fund‑-state appropriation for fiscal year 2002 and $1,000,000 of
the general fund‑-state appropriation for fiscal year 2003 are provided
solely for tuition support for students enrolled in work-based learning
programs.

(8) $567,000 of the
general fund‑-state appropriation for fiscal year 2002 and $568,000 of
the general fund‑-state appropriation for fiscal year 2003 are provided
solely for administration and customized training contracts through the job
skills program.

(9) $50,000 of the
general fund‑-state appropriation for fiscal year 2002 and $50,000 of the
general fund‑-state appropriation for fiscal year 2003 are solely for
higher education student child care matching grants under chapter 28B.135 RCW.

(10) $212,000 of the
general fund‑-state appropriation for fiscal year 2002 and $212,000 of
the general fund‑-state appropriation for fiscal year 2003 are provided
for allocation to Olympic college. The college shall contract with accredited
baccalaureate institution(s) to bring a program of upper-division courses to
Bremerton. Funds provided are sufficient to support at least 30 additional
annual full-time equivalent students. The state board for community and
technical colleges shall report to the office of financial management and the
fiscal and higher education committees of the legislature on the implementation
of this subsection by December 1st of each fiscal year.

(11) The entire
education savings account appropriation is provided solely to support the
development of a multicollege student-centered online service center for
distance learners, including self-service internet applications and staff
support 24 hours per day. Moneys may be allocated by the office of financial
management upon certification that sufficient cash is available beyond the
appropriations made for the 2001-03 biennium for the purposes of common school construction.

Sec. 604. 2001 2nd sp.s. c 7 s 604
(uncodified) is amended to read as follows:

FOR UNIVERSITY OF WASHINGTON

General Fund‑-State
Appropriation (FY 2002).... $ ((345,974,000))

345,904,000

General Fund‑-State
Appropriation (FY 2003).... $ ((361,114,000))

341,066,000

Death Investigations
Account‑-State

Appropriation.............................. $ ((259,000))

258,000

University of Washington
Building Account‑-

State Appropriation........................ $ 1,103,000

Accident Account‑-State
Appropriation.......... $ ((5,891,000))

5,870,000

Medical Aid Account‑-State
Appropriation........ $...................................... ((5,945,000))

5,926,000

TOTAL
APPROPRIATION................. $ ((720,286,000))

700,127,000

The appropriations in
this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations:

(1) The university may
reallocate 10 percent of newly budgeted enrollments to campuses other than as
specified by the legislature in section 602 of this act in order to focus on
high demand areas. The university shall report the details of these
reallocations to the office of financial management and the fiscal and higher
education committees of the legislature for monitoring purposes by the 10th day
of the academic quarter that follows the reallocation actions. The report
shall provide details of undergraduate and graduate enrollments at the main
campus and each of the branch campuses.

(2) $2,000,000 of the
general fund‑-state appropriation for fiscal year 2002 and $2,000,000 of
the general fund‑-state appropriation for fiscal year 2003 are provided
solely to create a state resource for technology education in the form of an
institute located at the University of Washington, Tacoma. It is the intent of
the legislature that at least ninety-nine of the full-time equivalent
enrollments allocated to the university's Tacoma branch campus for the 2002-03
academic year may be used to establish the technology institute. The
university will expand undergraduate and graduate degree programs meeting
regional technology needs including, but not limited to, computing and software
systems. As a condition of these appropriations:

(a) The university will
work with the state board for community and technical colleges, or individual
colleges where necessary, to establish articulation agreements in addition to
the existing associate of arts and associate of science transfer degrees. Such
agreements shall improve the transferability of students and in particular,
students with substantial applied information technology credits.

(b) The university will
establish performance measures for recruiting, retaining and graduating
students, including nontraditional students, and report back to the governor
and legislature by September 2002 as to its progress and future steps.

(3) $150,000 of the
general fund‑-state appropriation for fiscal year 2002 and $150,000 of
the general fund‑-state appropriation for fiscal year 2003 are provided
solely for research faculty clusters in the advanced technology initiative
program.

(4) The department of
environmental health shall report to the legislature the historical, current,
and anticipated use of funds provided from the accident and medical aid
accounts. The report shall be submitted prior to the convening of the 2002
legislative session.

(5) $259,000 of the
death investigations account appropriation is provided solely for the forensic
pathologist fellowship program.

(6) $150,000 of the
general fund‑-state appropriation for fiscal year 2002 and $150,000 of
the general fund‑-state appropriation for fiscal year 2003 are provided
solely for the implementation of the Puget Sound work plan and agency action
item UW-01.

(7) $75,000 of the
general fund‑-state appropriation for fiscal year 2002 and $75,000 of the
general fund‑-state appropriation for fiscal year 2003 are provided
solely for the Olympic natural resource center.

(8) $50,000 of the
general fund‑-state appropriations are provided solely for the school of
medicine to conduct a survey designed to evaluate characteristics, factors and
probable causes for the high incidence of multiple sclerosis cases in
Washington state.

(9) $1,103,000 of the
University of Washington building account‑-state appropriation is
provided solely for the repair and reconstruction of the Urban Horticulture
Center (Merrill Hall).

Sec. 605. 2001 2nd sp.s. c 7 s 605
(uncodified) is amended to read as follows:

FOR WASHINGTON STATE
UNIVERSITY

General Fund‑-State
Appropriation (FY 2002).... $ ((201,416,000))

201,362,000

General Fund‑-State
Appropriation (FY 2003).... $ ((209,939,000))

198,084,000

TOTAL
APPROPRIATION................. $ ((411,355,000))

399,446,000

The appropriations in
this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations:

(1) The university may
reallocate 10 percent of newly budgeted enrollments to campuses other than
specified by the legislature in section 602 of this act in order to focus on
high demand areas. The university will report the details of these
reallocations to the office of financial management and the fiscal and higher
education committees of the legislature for monitoring purposes by the 10th day
of the academic quarter that follows the reallocation actions. The report will
provide details of undergraduate and graduate enrollments at the main campus
and each of the branch campuses.

(2) $150,000 of the
general fund‑-state appropriation for fiscal year 2002 and $150,000 of
the general fund‑-state appropriation for fiscal year 2003 are provided
solely for research faculty clusters in the advanced technology initiative
program.

(3) $165,000 of the
general fund‑-state appropriation for fiscal year 2002 and $166,000 of the
general fund‑-state appropriation for fiscal year 2003 are provided
solely for the implementation of the Puget Sound work plan and agency action
item WSU-01.

Sec. 606. 2001 2nd sp.s. c 7 s 606
(uncodified) is amended to read as follows:

FOR EASTERN WASHINGTON
UNIVERSITY

General Fund‑-State
Appropriation (FY 2002).... $ ((45,532,000))

45,517,000

General Fund‑-State
Appropriation (FY 2003).... $ ((47,382,000))

44,689,000

TOTAL
APPROPRIATION................. $ ((92,914,000))

90,206,000

Sec. 607. 2001 2nd sp.s. c 7 s 607
(uncodified) is amended to read as follows:

FOR CENTRAL WASHINGTON
UNIVERSITY

General Fund‑-State
Appropriation (FY 2002).... $ ((44,164,000))

44,147,000

General Fund‑-State
Appropriation (FY 2003).... $ ((44,976,000))

42,690,000

TOTAL
APPROPRIATION................. $ ((89,140,000))

86,837,000

The appropriations in
this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations: $700,000
of the general fund‑-state appropriation for fiscal year 2002 ((is))
and $350,000 of the general fund‑-state appropriation for fiscal year
2003 are provided solely for the development and implementation of the
university's enrollment stabilization recovery and growth plan. The university
shall report back to the fiscal committees of the legislature, the office of
financial management, and the higher education coordinating board at the end of
each fiscal year with details of its actions and progress.

Sec. 608. 2001 2nd sp.s. c 7 s 608
(uncodified) is amended to read as follows:

FOR THE EVERGREEN STATE
COLLEGE

General Fund‑-State
Appropriation (FY 2002).... $ ((25,334,000))

25,340,000

General Fund‑-State
Appropriation (FY 2003).... $ ((26,260,000))

24,854,000

TOTAL
APPROPRIATION................. $ ((51,594,000))

50,194,000

The appropriations in
this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations:

(1) $75,000 of the
general fund‑-state appropriation for fiscal year 2002 is provided solely
for the institute for public policy to complete studies of services described
in section 202(1), chapter 1, Laws of 2000 2nd sp. sess.

(2) $11,000 of the
general fund‑-state appropriation for fiscal year 2002 and $54,000 of the
general fund‑-state appropriation for fiscal year 2003 are provided
solely for the institute for public policy to conduct an outcome evaluation
pursuant to Substitute Senate Bill No. 5416 (drug-affected infants). The
institute shall provide a report to the fiscal, health, and human services
committees of the legislature by December 1, 2003. If the bill is not enacted
by June 30, 2001, the amounts provided in this subsection shall be used to
evaluate outcomes across state health and social service pilot projects and
other national models involving women who have given birth to a drug-affected
infant, comparing gains in positive birth outcomes for resources invested, in
which case the institute's findings and recommendations will be provided by
November 15, 2002.

(3) $11,000 of the
general fund‑-state appropriation for fiscal year 2002 and $33,000 of the
general fund‑-state appropriation for fiscal year 2003 are provided
solely for the institute for public policy to evaluate partnership grant
programs for alternative teacher certification pursuant to Engrossed Second
Substitute Senate Bill No. 5695. An interim report shall be provided to the
fiscal and education committees of the legislature by December 1, 2002, and a
final report by December 1, 2004.

(4) $60,000 of the
general fund‑-state appropriation for fiscal year 2002 is provided solely
for the institute for public policy to examine options for revising the state's
funding formula for the learning assistance program to enhance accountability
for school performance in meeting education reform goals. The institute shall
submit its report to the appropriate legislative fiscal and policy committees
by June 30, 2002.

(5) $50,000 of the
general fund‑-state appropriation for fiscal year 2002 is provided solely
for the institute for public policy to study the prevalence and needs of
families who are raising related children. The study shall compare services
and policies of Washington state with other states that have a high rate of
kinship care placements in lieu of foster care placements. The study shall
identify possible changes in services and policies that are likely to increase
appropriate kinship care placements. A report shall be provided to the fiscal
and human services committees of the legislature by June 1, 2002.

(6) $35,000 of the
general fund‑-state appropriation for fiscal year 2002 and $15,000 of the
general fund‑-state appropriation for fiscal year 2003 are provided
solely for the institute for public policy to examine various educational
delivery models for providing services and education for students through the
Washington state school for the deaf. The institute's report, in conjunction
with the capacity planning study from the joint legislative audit and review
committee, shall be submitted to the fiscal committees of the legislature by
September 30, 2002.

(7) $30,000 of the
general fund‑-state appropriation for fiscal year 2002 is provided solely
for the institute for public policy to examine the structure, policies, and
recent experience in states where welfare recipients may attend college
full-time as their required TANF work activity. The institute will provide
findings and recommend how Washington could consider adding this feature in a
targeted, cost-neutral manner that would complement the present-day WorkFirst
efforts and caseload. The institute shall provide a report to the human
services, higher education, and fiscal committees of the legislature by
November 15, 2001.

(8) $75,000 of the
general fund‑-state appropriation for fiscal year 2002 and $75,000 of the
general fund‑-state appropriation for fiscal year 2003 are provided
solely for the institute for public policy to research and evaluate strategies
for constraining the growth in state health expenditures. Specific research
topics, approaches, and timelines shall be identified in consultation with the
fiscal committees of the legislature.

(9) $100,000 of the
general fund‑-state appropriation for fiscal year 2002 is provided solely
for the institute for public policy to conduct a comprehensive review of the
costs and benefits of existing juvenile crime prevention and intervention
programs. This evaluation shall also consider what changes could result in
more cost-effective and efficient funding for juvenile crime prevention and
intervention programs presently supported with state funds. The institute for
public policy shall report its findings and recommendations to the appropriate
legislative fiscal and policy committees by October 1, 2002.

(10) $15,000 of the
general fund‑-state appropriation for fiscal year 2002 and $71,000 of the
general fund‑-state appropriation for fiscal year 2003 are provided
solely for the institute for public policy to conduct a review of branch
campuses of the state's higher education research universities. The study
shall examine: (a) The original mission of branch campuses; (b) the extent
branch campuses are meeting their original mission; and (c) the extent key
factors that led to the creation of branch campuses have changed, including
student demographics, demand for and availability of upper division higher
education, and local or state labor markets. The study shall also include a
range of policy options the legislature could consider regarding branch
campuses. The institute shall submit an interim report by December 12, 2002,
and a final report by June 30, 2003, to appropriate legislative committees.

(11) $40,000 of the
general fund‑-state appropriation for fiscal year 2003 is provided solely
for the institute for public policy to review the mission and operations of the
higher education coordinating board. The study shall include evaluation of the
board's role and current practices in policy setting, evaluation, review and
approval of higher education programs and budgets, and administration of
financial aid programs. The institute shall submit its findings to the higher
education and fiscal committees of the legislature by December 12, 2002.

Sec. 609. 2001 2nd sp.s. c 7 s 609
(uncodified) is amended to read as follows:

FOR WESTERN WASHINGTON
UNIVERSITY

General Fund‑-State
Appropriation (FY 2002).... $ ((59,755,000))

59,732,000

General Fund‑-State
Appropriation (FY 2003).... $ ((62,881,000))

59,319,000

TOTAL
APPROPRIATION................. $ ((122,636,000))

119,051,000

The appropriations in
this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations: $753,000
of the general fund‑-state appropriation for fiscal year 2002 and (($1,032,000))
$990,720 of the general fund‑-state appropriation for fiscal year
2003 are provided solely for the operations of the North Snohomish, Island,
Skagit (NSIS) higher education consortium.

Sec. 610. 2001 2nd sp.s. c 7 s 610
(uncodified) is amended to read as follows:

FOR THE HIGHER EDUCATION
COORDINATING BOARD‑-POLICY COORDINATION AND
ADMINISTRATION

General Fund‑-State
Appropriation (FY 2002).... $ 2,345,000

General Fund‑-State
Appropriation (FY 2003).... $ ((2,408,000))

2,372,000

General Fund‑-Federal
Appropriation............. $ 636,000

TOTAL
APPROPRIATION................. $ ((5,389,000))

5,353,000

The appropriations in
this section are provided to carry out the policy coordination, planning,
studies and administrative functions of the board and are subject to the
following conditions and limitations:

(1) $150,000 of the
general fund‑-state appropriation for fiscal year 2002 and $150,000 of
the general fund‑-state appropriation for fiscal year 2003 are provided
solely to continue the teacher training pilot program pursuant to chapter 177,
Laws of 1999.

(2) $105,000 of the
general fund‑-state appropriation for fiscal year 2002 and $245,000 of
the general fund‑-state appropriation for fiscal year 2003 are provided
solely to continue a demonstration project to improve rural access to
post-secondary education by bringing distance learning technologies into
Jefferson county.

Sec. 611. 2001 2nd sp.s. c 7 s 611
(uncodified) is amended to read as follows:

FOR THE HIGHER EDUCATION
COORDINATING BOARD‑-FINANCIAL AID AND GRANT
PROGRAMS

General Fund‑-State
Appropriation (FY 2002).... $ 123,645,000

General Fund‑-State
Appropriation (FY 2003).... $ ((136,205,000))

136,685,000

General Fund‑-Federal
Appropriation............. $.................................. 7,511,000

Advanced College Tuition
Payment Program Account‑-

State Appropriation........................ $ ((3,604,000))

1,803,000

TOTAL
APPROPRIATION................. $ ((270,965,000))

269,644,000

The appropriations in
this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations:

(1) $534,000 of the
general fund‑-state appropriation for fiscal year 2002 and $529,000 of
the general fund‑-state appropriation for fiscal year 2003 are provided
solely for the displaced homemakers program.

(2) $234,000 of the
general fund‑-state appropriation for fiscal year 2002 and $240,000 of
the general fund‑-state appropriation for fiscal year 2003 are provided
solely for the western interstate commission for higher education.

(3) $1,000,000 of the
general fund‑-state appropriation for fiscal year 2002 and $1,000,000 of
the general fund‑-state appropriation for fiscal year 2003 are provided
solely for the health professional conditional scholarship and loan program
under chapter 28B.115 RCW. This amount shall be deposited to the health
professional loan repayment and scholarship trust fund to carry out the
purposes of the program.

(4) $1,000,000 of the
general fund‑-state appropriations is provided solely to continue a
demonstration project that enables classified public K-12 employees to become
future teachers, subject to the following conditions and limitations:

(a) Within available
funds, the board may renew and offer conditional scholarships of up to $4,000
per year for full or part-time studies that may be forgiven in exchange for
teaching service in Washington's public K-12 schools. In selecting loan
recipients, the board shall take into account the applicant's demonstrated
academic ability and commitment to serve as a teacher within the state of
Washington.

(b) Loans shall be
forgiven at the rate of one year of loan for two years of teaching service.
Recipients who teach in geographic or subject-matter shortage areas, as
specified by the office of the superintendent for public instruction, may have
their loans forgiven at the rate of one year of loan for one year of teaching
service;

(c) Recipients who fail
to fulfill the required teaching service shall be required to repay the
conditional loan with interest. The board shall define the terms for
repayment, including applicable interest rates, fees and deferments, and may
adopt other rules as necessary to implement this demonstration project.

(d) The board may
deposit this appropriation and all collections into the student loan account
authorized in RCW 28B.102.060.

(e) The board will
provide the legislature and governor with findings about the impact of this
demonstration project on persons entering the teaching profession in shortage
areas by no later than January of 2002.

(5) $75,000 of the
general fund‑-state appropriation for fiscal year 2002 and $75,000 of the
general fund‑-state appropriation for fiscal year 2003 are provided
solely for higher education student child care matching grants under chapter
28B.135 RCW.

(6) $25,000 of the
general fund‑-state appropriation for fiscal year 2002 and $25,000 of the
general fund‑-state appropriation for fiscal year 2003 are provided
solely for the benefit of students who participate in college assistance
migrant programs (CAMP) operating in Washington state. To ensure timely state
aid, the board may establish a date after which no additional grants would be
available for the 2001-02 and 2002-03 academic years. The board shall disperse
grants in equal amounts to eligible post-secondary institutions so that state
money in all cases supplements federal CAMP awards.

(7) $120,156,000 of the
general fund‑-state appropriation for fiscal year 2002 and (($133,965,000))
$135,521,000 of the general fund‑-state appropriation for fiscal
year 2003 are provided solely for student financial aid, including all
administrative costs. Of these amounts:

(a) $90,566,000 of the
general fund‑-state appropriation for fiscal year 2002 and (($102,667,000))
$104,718,000 of the general fund‑-state appropriation for fiscal
year 2003 are provided solely for the state need grant program. After April 1
of each fiscal year, up to one percent of the annual appropriation for the
state need grant program may be transferred to the state work study program.
For the remainder of the 2001-03 biennium, the higher education coordinating
board shall limit or suspend growth to individual state need grant levels to
the extent necessary to ensure that students who meet the financial eligibility
requirements of fifty-five percent of median family income are served;

(b) $16,340,000 of the
general fund‑-state appropriation for fiscal year 2002 and $17,360,000 of
the general fund‑-state appropriation for fiscal year 2003 are provided
solely for the state work study program. After April 1 of each fiscal year, up
to one percent of the annual appropriation for the state work study program may
be transferred to the state need grant program. A maximum of 4 percent of
the general fund‑-state amount in this subsection for fiscal year 2003
may be expended for state work study program administration;

(c) $2,920,000 of the
general fund‑-state appropriation for fiscal year 2002 and $2,920,000 of
the general fund‑-state appropriation for fiscal year 2003 are provided
solely for educational opportunity grants. The board may deposit sufficient
funds from its appropriation into the state education trust fund as established
in RCW 28B.10.821 to provide a one-year renewal of the grant for each new
recipient of the educational opportunity grant award. For the purpose of
establishing eligibility for the equal opportunity grant program for placebound
students under RCW 28B.101.020, Thurston county lies within the branch campus
service area of the Tacoma branch campus of the University of Washington;

(d) A maximum of 2.1
percent of the general fund‑-state appropriation for fiscal year 2002 and
((2.1)) 1.8 percent of the general fund‑-state
appropriation for fiscal year 2003, excluding appropriations provided for
the work study program in (b) of this subsection, may be expended for
financial aid administration((, excluding the 4 percent state work study
program administrative allowance provision));

(e) $1,241,000 of the
general fund‑-state appropriation for fiscal year 2002 and $1,428,000 of
the general fund‑-state appropriation for fiscal year 2003 are provided
solely to implement the Washington scholars program. Any Washington scholars
program moneys not awarded by April 1st of each year may be transferred by the
board to the Washington award for vocational excellence;

(f) $588,000 of the
general fund‑-state appropriation for fiscal year 2002 and $589,000 of
the general fund‑-state appropriation for fiscal year 2003 are provided
solely to implement Washington award for vocational excellence program. Any Washington
award for vocational program moneys not awarded by April 1st of each year may
be transferred by the board to the Washington scholars program;

(g) $251,000 of the
general fund‑-state appropriation for fiscal year 2002 and $251,000 of
the general fund‑-state appropriation for fiscal year 2003 are provided
solely for community scholarship matching grants of $2,000 each. Of the
amounts provided, no more than $5,200 each year is for the administration of
the community scholarship matching grant program. To be eligible for the
matching grant, a nonprofit community organization organized under section
501(c)(3) of the internal revenue code must demonstrate that it has raised
$2,000 in new moneys for college scholarships after the effective date of this act.
An organization may receive more than one $2,000 matching grant and preference
shall be given to organizations affiliated with the citizens' scholarship
foundation; and

(h) $8,250,000 of the
general fund‑-state appropriation for fiscal year 2002 and (($8,750,000))
$7,550,000 of the general fund‑-state appropriation for fiscal
year 2003 are provided solely for the Washington promise scholarship program
subject to the following conditions and limitations:

(i) Within available
funds, the higher education coordinating board shall award scholarships for use
at accredited institutions of higher education in the state of Washington to as
many students as possible from among those qualifying under (iv) of this
subsection. Each qualifying student will receive two consecutive annual
installments, the value of each not to exceed the full-time annual resident
tuition rates charged by community colleges. Scholarships awarded to new
recipients for the 2002-03 academic year shall not exceed one-thousand dollars
per student.

(ii) Of the amounts
provided, no more than $260,000 each year is for administration of the
Washington promise scholarship program.

(iii) Other than funds
provided for program administration, the higher education coordinating board
shall deposit all money received for the program in the Washington promise
scholarship account, a nonappropriated fund in the custody of the state
treasurer. The account shall be self-sustaining and consist of funds
appropriated by the legislature for these scholarships, private contributions,
and receipts from refunds of tuition and fees.

(iv) Scholarships in
the 2001-03 biennium shall be awarded to students who graduate from high school
or its equivalent whose family income does not exceed one hundred thirty-five percent
of the state's median family income, adjusted for family size, if they meet any
of the following academic criteria:

(A) Students graduating
from public and approved private high schools under chapter 28A.195 RCW must be
in the top fifteen percent of their graduating class, or must equal or exceed a
cumulative scholastic assessment test score of 1200 on their first attempt;

(B) Students
participating in home-based instruction as provided in chapter 28A.200 RCW must
equal or exceed a cumulative scholastic assessment test score of 1200 on their
first attempt.

(v) For students
eligible under (iv) of this subsection, the superintendent of public
instruction shall provide the higher education coordinating board with the
names, addresses, and unique numeric identifiers of students in the top fifteen
percent or who meet the scholastic aptitude test score requirement, as
appropriate in each of the respective high school senior or home based
instruction classes in Washington state. This shall be provided no later than
October 1 of each year.

(vi) Scholarships
awarded under this section may only be used at accredited institutions of
higher education in the state of Washington for college-related expenses,
including but not limited to, tuition, room and board, books, materials, and
transportation. The Washington promise scholarship award shall not supplant
other scholarship awards, financial aid, or tax programs related to
postsecondary education. Scholarships may not be transferred or refunded to
students.

(vii) The higher
education coordinating board shall evaluate the impact and effectiveness of the
Washington promise scholarship program. The evaluation shall include, but not
be limited to: (A) An analysis of other financial assistance promise scholarship
recipients are receiving through other federal, state, and institutional
programs, including grants, work study, tuition waivers, tax credits, and loan
programs; (B) an analysis of whether the implementation of the promise
scholarship program has had an impact on student indebtedness; and (C) an
evaluation of what types of students are successfully completing high school
but do not have the financial ability to attend college because they cannot
obtain financial aid or the financial aid is insufficient. The board shall
report its findings to the governor and the legislature by December 1, 2002.

(viii) The higher
education coordinating board may adopt rules as necessary to implement this
program.

Sec. 612. 2001 2nd sp.s. c 7 s 612
(uncodified) is amended to read as follows:

FOR THE WORK FORCE TRAINING AND
EDUCATION COORDINATING BOARD

General Fund‑-State
Appropriation (FY 2002).... $ 1,762,000

General Fund‑-State
Appropriation (FY 2003).... $ ((1,720,000))

1,668,000

General Fund‑-Federal
Appropriation............. $.................................. 44,987,000

TOTAL
APPROPRIATION................. $ ((48,469,000))

48,417,000

The appropriations in
this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations: $500,000
of the general fund‑-state appropriation for fiscal year 2002 and
$500,000 of the general fund‑-state appropriation for fiscal year 2003
are provided solely for the operations and development of the inland northwest
technology education center (INTEC) as a regional resource and model for the
rapid deployment of skilled workers trained in the latest technologies for
Washington. The board shall serve as an advisor to and fiscal agent for INTEC,
and will report back to the governor and legislature by September 2002 as to
the progress and future steps for INTEC as this new public-private partnership
evolves.

Sec. 613. 2001 2nd sp.s. c 7 s 613
(uncodified) is amended to read as follows:

FOR THE SPOKANE INTERCOLLEGIATE
RESEARCH AND TECHNOLOGY INSTITUTE

General Fund‑-State
Appropriation (FY 2002).... $ ((1,500,000))

1,499,000

General Fund‑-State
Appropriation (FY 2003).... $ ((1,500,000))

997,000

TOTAL
APPROPRIATION................. $ ((3,000,000))

2,496,000

Sec. 614. 2001 2nd sp.s. c 7 s 614
(uncodified) is amended to read as follows:

FOR WASHINGTON STATE LIBRARY

General Fund‑-State
Appropriation (FY 2002).... $ 8,791,000

General Fund‑-State
Appropriation (FY 2003).... $ ((8,786,000))

3,209,000

General Fund‑-Federal
Appropriation............. $.................................. 6,976,000

TOTAL
APPROPRIATION................. $ ((24,553,000))

18,976,000

The appropriations in
this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations: At least
$2,700,000 shall be expended for a contract with the Seattle public library for
library services for the Washington book and braille library.

Sec. 615. 2001 2nd sp.s. c 7 s 615
(uncodified) is amended to read as follows:

FOR THE WASHINGTON STATE ARTS
COMMISSION

General Fund‑-State
Appropriation (FY 2002).... $ 2,873,000

General Fund‑-State
Appropriation (FY 2003).... $ ((2,874,000))

2,788,000

General Fund‑-Federal
Appropriation............. $.................................. 1,000,000

General Fund‑-Private/Local
Appropriation...... $ 3,000

TOTAL
APPROPRIATION................. $ ((6,747,000))

6,664,000

Sec. 616. 2001 2nd sp.s. c 7 s 616
(uncodified) is amended to read as follows:

FOR THE WASHINGTON STATE
HISTORICAL SOCIETY

General Fund‑-State
Appropriation (FY 2002).... $ 2,899,000

General Fund‑-State
Appropriation (FY 2003).... $ ((3,129,000))

3,035,000

TOTAL
APPROPRIATION................. $ ((6,028,000))

5,934,000

The appropriations in
this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations: $90,000
of the general fund‑-state appropriation for fiscal year 2002 and
$285,000 of the general fund‑-state appropriation for fiscal year 2003
are provided solely for activities related to the Lewis and Clark Bicentennial.

Sec. 617. 2001 2nd sp.s. c 7 s 617
(uncodified) is amended to read as follows:

FOR THE EASTERN WASHINGTON STATE
HISTORICAL SOCIETY

General Fund‑-State
Appropriation (FY 2002).... $ 1,674,000

General Fund‑-State
Appropriation (FY 2003).... $ ((1,535,000))

1,489,000

TOTAL
APPROPRIATION................. $ ((3,209,000))

3,163,000

Sec. 618. 2001 2nd sp.s. c 7 s 618
(uncodified) is amended to read as follows:

FOR THE STATE SCHOOL FOR THE
BLIND

General Fund‑-State
Appropriation (FY 2002).... $ 4,520,000

General Fund‑-State
Appropriation (FY 2003).... $ ((4,591,000))

4,523,000

General Fund‑-Private/Local
Appropriation...... $ ((1,173,000))

1,254,000

TOTAL
APPROPRIATION................. $ ((10,284,000))

10,297,000

Sec. 619. 2001 2nd sp.s. c 7 s 619
(uncodified) is amended to read as follows:

FOR THE STATE SCHOOL FOR THE
DEAF

General Fund‑-State
Appropriation (FY 2002).... $ 7,395,000

General Fund‑-State
Appropriation (FY 2003).... $ ((7,439,000))

7,538,000

General Fund‑-Private/Local
Appropriation...... $ 232,000

TOTAL
APPROPRIATION................. $ ((15,066,000))

15,165,000

The
appropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and
limitations: $250,000 of the general fund‑-state appropriation for
fiscal year 2003 is provided solely for additional staffing and other student
safety measures at the school. The school will hire six additional staff,
increase staff communications and accessibility, and implement a training
program to enhance staff members' abilities to work with at-risk youth.

(End
of part)

PART
VII

SPECIAL APPROPRIATIONS

Sec. 701. 2001 2nd sp.s. c 7 s 701
(uncodified) is amended to read as follows:

FOR THE STATE TREASURER‑-BOND RETIREMENT AND
INTEREST, AND ONGOING BOND REGISTRATION AND TRANSFER CHARGES: FOR DEBT SUBJECT
TO THE DEBT LIMIT

General Fund‑-State
Appropriation (FY 2002).... $ ((629,097,000))

584,097,000

General Fund‑-State
Appropriation (FY 2003).... $ ((567,290,000))

612,290,000

State Building Construction
Account‑-State

Appropriation.............................. $ ((11,351,000))

7,999,000

State Taxable Building
Construction Account‑-

State Appropriation........................ $ 496,000

Debt-Limit Reimbursable
Bond Retire Account‑‑

State Appropriation........................ $ 2,591,000

TOTAL
APPROPRIATION................. $ ((1,210,329,000))

1,207,473,000

The appropriations in
this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations: The
general fund appropriations are for deposit into the debt-limit general fund
bond retirement account. The appropriation for fiscal year 2002 shall be
deposited in the debt-limit general fund bond retirement account by June 30,
2002.

Sec. 702. 2001 2nd sp.s. c 7 s 702
(uncodified) is amended to read as follows:

FOR THE STATE TREASURER‑-BOND RETIREMENT AND
INTEREST, AND ONGOING BOND REGISTRATION AND TRANSFER CHARGES: FOR GENERAL
OBLIGATION DEBT TO BE REIMBURSED BY ENTERPRISE ACTIVITIES

State Convention and Trade
Center Account‑‑

State Appropriation........................ $ ((39,950,000))

29,249,000

Accident Account‑-State
Appropriation.......... $ ((5,590,000))

5,096,000

Medical Aid Account‑-State
Appropriation........ $...................................... ((5,590,000))

5,096,000

TOTAL
APPROPRIATION................. $ ((51,130,000))

39,441,000

Sec. 703. 2001 2nd sp.s. c 7 s 703
(uncodified) is amended to read as follows:

FOR THE STATE TREASURER‑-BOND RETIREMENT AND
INTEREST, AND ONGOING BOND REGISTRATION AND TRANSFER CHARGES: FOR GENERAL
OBLIGATION DEBT TO BE REIMBURSED AS PRESCRIBED BY STATUTE

General Fund‑-State
Appropriation (FY 2002).... $ 24,542,000

General Fund‑-State
Appropriation (FY 2003).... $ 26,706,000

Capitol Historic District
Construction

Account‑-State
Appropriation............... $ 454,000

Higher Education
Construction Account‑-State

Appropriation.............................. $ ((815,000))

499,000

State Higher Education
Construction Account‑‑

State Appropriation........................ $ ((348,000))

50,000

State Vehicle Parking
Account‑-State

Appropriation.............................. $ ((35,000))

100,000

Nondebt-Limit Reimbursable
Bond Retirement Account‑‑

State Appropriation........................ $ 128,043,000

TOTAL
APPROPRIATION................. $ ((180,943,000))

180,394,000

The appropriations in
this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations: The
general fund appropriation is for deposit into the nondebt-limit general fund
bond retirement account.

Sec. 704. 2001 2nd sp.s. c 7 s 704
(uncodified) is amended to read as follows:

FOR THE STATE TREASURER‑-BOND RETIREMENT AND
INTEREST, AND ONGOING BOND REGISTRATION AND TRANSFER CHARGES: FOR BOND SALE
EXPENSES

General Fund‑-State Appropriation
(FY 2002).... $ 567,000

General Fund‑-State
Appropriation (FY 2003).... $ 568,000

Higher Education
Construction Account‑-State

Appropriation.............................. $ 77,000

State Higher Education
Construction Account‑‑

State Appropriation........................ $ 42,000

State Building Construction
Account‑-State

Appropriation.............................. $ 1,488,000

State Vehicle Parking
Account‑-State

Appropriation.............................. $ ((5,000))

10,000

Capitol Historic District
Construction

Account‑-State
Appropriation............... $ 130,000

State Taxable Building
Construction Account‑-

State Appropriation........................ $ 50,000

TOTAL
APPROPRIATION................. $ ((2,877,000))

2,932,000

Sec. 705. 2001 2nd sp.s. c 7 s 705
(uncodified) is amended to read as follows:

FOR THE OFFICE OF
FINANCIAL MANAGEMENT‑-EMERGENCY FUND

General Fund‑-State
Appropriation (FY 2002).... $ 850,000

General Fund‑-State
Appropriation (FY 2003).... $ ((850,000))

9,350,000

TOTAL
APPROPRIATION......... ........ $ ((1,700,000))

10,200,000

The appropriations in
this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations: The
appropriations in this section are for the governor's emergency fund to be
used for mitigation funding or incentive grants for jurisdictions affected by
the placement of less restrictive alternative facilities for persons
conditionally released from the special commitment center and for the
critically necessary work of any agency. Up to $5,298,000 of the fiscal
year 2003 appropriation is provided for costs associated with implementing
House Bill No. 2926 (transferring the state library to the office of secretary
of state.)

Sec. 706. 2001 2nd sp.s. c 7 s 706
(uncodified) is amended to read as follows:

FOR THE OFFICE OF
FINANCIAL MANAGEMENT‑-FIRE CONTINGENCY POOL. The sum of ((three million dollars)) $35,983,000,
or so much thereof as may be available on June 30, 2001, from the total amount
of unspent fiscal year 2001 fire contingency funding in the disaster response
account and the moneys appropriated to the disaster response account in section
707 of this act, is appropriated for the purpose of making allocations to the
military department for fire mobilizations costs or to the department of
natural resources for fire suppression costs. Of this amount, $24,009,000
shall be provided to the department of natural resources, $135,000 shall be
provided to the state parks and recreation commission, and $60,000 shall be
provided to the department of fish and wildlife, for costs of fire suppression
during the 2001 fire season.

Sec. 707. 2001 2nd sp.s. c 7 s 708
(uncodified) is amended to read as follows:

FOR THE OFFICE OF FINANCIAL
MANAGEMENT‑-EXTRAORDINARY CRIMINAL
JUSTICE COSTS

Public Safety and Education‑-State

Appropriation.............................. $ ((975,000))

1,325,000

The appropriation in
this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations: The
director of financial management shall distribute the appropriation to the
following counties in the amounts designated for extraordinary criminal justice
costs:

Cowlitz.................................... $ 89,000

Franklin................. ................. $ ((303,000))

653,000

Klickitat.................................. $ 45,000

Skagit..................................... $ 102,000

Spokane.................................... $ 192,000

Thurston................................... $ 122,000

Yakima..................................... $ 121,000

-------------

TOTAL............................... $ ((975,000))

1,325,000

Sec. 708. 2001 2nd sp.s. c 7 s 716
(uncodified) is amended to read as follows:

FOR THE GOVERNOR‑-COMPENSATION‑-INSURANCE
BENEFITS

General Fund‑‑State
Appropriation (FY 2002).... $ 7,218,000

General Fund‑‑State
Appropriation (FY 2003).... $ ((19,947,000))

7,031,000

General Fund‑‑Federal
Appropriation............. $.................................. ((8,692,000))

5,343,000

General Fund‑‑Private/Local
Appropriation...... $ ((456,000))

148,000

Salary and Insurance
Increase Revolving Account

Appropriation.............................. $ ((19,468,000))

10,660,000

TOTAL
APPROPRIATION................. $ ((55,781,000))

30,400,000

The appropriations in
this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations:

(1)(a) The monthly
employer funding rate for insurance benefit premiums, public employees'
benefits board administration, and the uniform medical plan, shall not exceed
$457.29 per eligible employee for fiscal year 2002, and (($497.69)) $461.17
for fiscal year 2003.

(b) Within the rates in
(a) of this subsection, $2.02 per eligible employee shall be included in the
employer funding rate for fiscal year 2002, and $4.10 per eligible employee
shall be included in the employer funding rate for fiscal year 2003, solely to
increase life insurance coverage in accordance with a court approved settlement
in Burbage et al. v. State of Washington (Thurston county superior court
cause no. 94-2-02560-8).

(c) In order to achieve
the level of funding provided for health benefits, the public employees'
benefits board shall require any or all of the following: Employee premium
copayments, increases in point-of-service cost sharing, the implementation of
managed competition, or make other changes to benefits consistent with RCW
41.05.065.

(d) The health care
authority shall deposit any moneys received on behalf of the uniform medical
plan as a result of rebates on prescription drugs, audits of hospitals,
subrogation payments, or any other moneys recovered as a result of prior
uniform medical plan claims payments, into the public employees' and retirees'
insurance account to be used for insurance benefits. Such receipts shall not
be used for administrative expenditures.

(2) To facilitate the
transfer of moneys from dedicated funds and accounts, the state treasurer is
directed to transfer sufficient moneys from each dedicated fund or account to
the special fund salary and insurance contribution increase revolving fund in
accordance with schedules provided by the office of financial management.

(3) The health care
authority, subject to the approval of the public employees' benefits board,
shall provide subsidies for health benefit premiums to eligible retired or
disabled public employees and school district employees who are eligible for
parts A and B of medicare, pursuant to RCW 41.05.085. From January 1, 2002,
through December 31, 2002, the subsidy shall be $85.84. Starting January 1,
2003, the subsidy shall be $102.55 per month.

(4) Technical colleges,
school districts, and educational service districts shall remit to the health
care authority for deposit into the public employees' and retirees' insurance
account established in RCW 41.05.120 the following amounts:

(a) For each full-time
employee, $32.41 per month beginning September 1, 2001, and (($37.48)) $37.06
beginning September 1, 2002;

(b) For each part-time
employee who, at the time of the remittance, is employed in an eligible
position as defined in RCW 41.32.010 or 41.40.010 and is eligible for employer
fringe benefit contributions for basic benefits, $32.41 each month beginning
September 1, 2001, and (($37.48)) $37.06 beginning September 1,
2002, prorated by the proportion of employer fringe benefit contributions for a
full-time employee that the part-time employee receives.

The remittance
requirements specified in this subsection shall not apply to employees of a
technical college, school district, or educational service district who
purchase insurance benefits through contracts with the health care authority.

(5) The salary and
insurance increase revolving account appropriation includes amounts sufficient
to fund health benefits for ferry workers at the premium levels specified in
subsection (1) of this section, consistent with the 2001-2003 transportation
appropriations act.

Sec. 709. 2001 2nd sp.s. c 7 s 717
(uncodified) is amended to read as follows:

FOR THE DEPARTMENT
OF RETIREMENT SYSTEMS‑-CONTRIBUTIONS TO
RETIREMENT SYSTEMS. The
appropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and
limitations: The appropriations for the law enforcement officers' and
firefighters' retirement system shall be made on a monthly basis beginning July
1, 2001, consistent with chapter 41.45 RCW, and the appropriations for the judges
and judicial retirement systems shall be made on a quarterly basis consistent
with chapters 2.10 and 2.12 RCW.

(1) There is
appropriated for state contributions to the law enforcement officers' and fire
fighters' retirement system:

General Fund‑‑State
Appropriation (FY 2002).... $ ((15,552,000))

15,437,000

General Fund‑‑State
Appropriation (FY 2003).... $ ((16,668,000))

16,208,000

The appropriations in
this subsection are subject to the following conditions and limitations: The
appropriations include reductions to reflect savings resulting from the
implementation of state pension contribution rates effective ((July 1, 2001))
April 1, 2002, as provided in ((Senate Bill No. 6167 or)) House
Bill No. ((2236)) 2782.

(2) There is
appropriated for contributions to the judicial retirement system:

General Fund‑‑State
Appropriation (FY 2002).... $ 6,000,000

General Fund‑‑State
Appropriation (FY 2003).... $ 6,000,000

(3) There is
appropriated for contributions to the judges retirement system:

General Fund‑‑State
Appropriation (FY 2002).... $ 250,000

General Fund‑‑State
Appropriation (FY 2003).... $ 250,000

TOTAL
APPROPRIATION................. $ ((44,720,000))

44,145,000

NEW SECTION. Sec.
710. A new section is added
to 2001 2nd sp.s. c 7 (uncodified) to read as follows:

FOR THE OFFICE OF
FINANCIAL MANAGEMENT‑-PENSION SAVINGS. The office of financial management shall reduce
the allotments for agencies of the state by $1,208,000 from the general fund‑‑state
fiscal year 2002 appropriations, $4,929,000 from the general fund‑-state
fiscal year 2003 appropriations, $1,606,000 from the general fund‑-federal
2001-03 appropriations, $148,000 from the general fund‑-private/local
2001-03 appropriations, and $4,326,000 from other funds 2001-03 allotments in
accordance with House Bill No. 2782 (actuarial experience study).

Sec. 711. 2001 2nd sp.s. c 7 s 719
(uncodified) is amended to read as follows:

SALARY COST OF LIVING
ADJUSTMENT

General Fund‑‑State
Appropriation (FY 2002).... $ 41,712,000

General Fund‑‑State
Appropriation (FY 2003).... $ ((73,358,000))

65,308,000

General Fund‑‑Federal
Appropriation............. $.................................. ((37,955,000))

31,158,000

General Fund‑‑Private/Local
Appropriation...... $ ((2,325,000))

2,362,000

Salary and Insurance
Increase Revolving Account

Appropriation.............................. $ ((92,156,000))

84,299,000

TOTAL
APPROPRIATION................. $ ((247,506,000))

224,839,000

The appropriations in
this section shall be expended solely for the purposes designated in this
section and are subject to the following conditions and limitations:

(1) In addition to the
purposes set forth in subsections (2) and (3) of this section, appropriations
in this section are provided solely for a 3.7 percent salary increase effective
July 1, 2001, and a 2.0 percent salary increase effective September 1, 2002,
for all classified employees, except the certificated employees of the state
schools for the deaf and blind, and including those employees in the Washington
management service, and exempt employees under the jurisdiction of the
personnel resources board. ((Funds are also provided for salary increases
for classified employees on July 1, 2002, in a percentage amount to be
determined by the 2002 legislature.))

(2) The appropriations
in this section are sufficient to fund a 3.7 percent salary increase effective
July 1, 2001, and a 2.0 percent salary increase effective September 1, 2002,
for general government, legislative, and judicial employees exempt from merit
system rules whose maximum salaries are not set by the commission on salaries
for elected officials. ((Funds are also provided for salary increases for
these employees on July 1, 2002, in a percentage amount to be determined by the
2002 legislature.))

(3) The salary and
insurance increase revolving account appropriation in this section includes
funds sufficient to fund a 3.7 percent salary increase effective July 1, 2001, and
a 2.0 percent salary increase effective September 1, 2002, for ferry
workers consistent with the 2001-03 transportation appropriations act. ((Funds
are also provided for salary increases for ferry workers on July 1, 2002, in a
percentage amount to be determined by the 2002 legislature.))

(4)(a) No salary
increase may be paid under this section to any person whose salary has been
Y-rated pursuant to rules adopted by the personnel resources board.

(b) The average salary
increases paid under this section to agency officials whose maximum salaries
are established by the committee on agency official salaries shall not exceed
the average increases provided by subsection (2) of this section.

Sec. 712. 2001 2nd sp.s. c 7 s 720
(uncodified) is amended to read as follows:

FOR THE OFFICE OF
FINANCIAL MANAGEMENT‑-EDUCATION TECHNOLOGY
REVOLVING ACCOUNT

General Fund‑‑State
Appropriation (FY 2002).... $ 11,264,000

((General Fund‑‑State
Appropriation (FY 2003)... $........................................... 11,264,000

TOTAL APPROPRIATION........................ $ 22,528,000))

The appropriation((s))
in this section ((are)) is subject to the following conditions
and limitations:

(1) The appropriation((s))
in this section ((are)) is for appropriation to the education
technology revolving account for the purpose of covering operational and
transport costs incurred by the K-20 educational network program in providing
telecommunication services to network participants.

(2) Use of these moneys
to connect public libraries are limited to public libraries which have in place
a policy of internet safety applied to publicly available computers with
internet access via the K-20 educational network that protects against access
to visual depictions that are (a) obscene under chapter 9.68 RCW; or (b) sexual
exploitation of children under chapter 9.68A RCW.

Sec. 713. 2001 2nd sp.s. c 7 s 721
(uncodified) is amended to read as follows:

FOR THE ATTORNEY GENERAL‑-SALARY ADJUSTMENTS

General Fund‑‑State
Appropriation (FY 2002).... $ 989,000

General Fund‑‑State
Appropriation (FY 2003).... $ ((2,082,000))

1,166,000

Legal Services Revolving
Account‑‑State

Appropriation.............................. $ ((3,071,000))

2,355,000

TOTAL
APPROPRIATION................. $ ((6,142,000))

4,510,000

The appropriations in
this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations: The
appropriations are provided solely for increases in salaries and related
benefits of assistant attorneys general effective July 1, 2001, and another
increase effective July 1, 2002. This funding is provided solely for: (1)
Increases in beginning salaries; (2) merit-based increases to recognize
outstanding performance; and (3) increases to address critical recruitment and
retention problems in specialty practice areas.

Sec. 714. 2001 2nd sp.s. c 7 s 722
(uncodified) is amended to read as follows:

FOR THE OFFICE OF
FINANCIAL MANAGEMENT‑-COMPENSATION ACTIONS OF
PERSONNEL RESOURCES BOARD

General Fund‑‑State
Appropriation (FY 2002).... $ ((9,179,000))

9,183,000

General Fund‑‑State
Appropriation (FY 2003).... $ ((18,359,000))

18,369,000

General Fund‑‑Federal
Appropriation............. $.................................. 10,392,000

Salary and Insurance
Increase Revolving Account

Appropriation.............................. $ ((2,735,000))

2,809,000

TOTAL
APPROPRIATION................. $ ((40,665,000))

40,753,000

The appropriations in
this section shall be expended solely for the purposes designated in this
section and are subject to the following conditions and limitations: Funding
is provided to implement the salary increase recommendations of the Washington
personnel resources board for the priority classes identified through item 8B
pursuant to RCW 41.06.152. The salary increases shall be effective January 1,
2002.

Sec. 715. 2001 2nd sp.s. c 7 s 723
(uncodified) is amended to read as follows:

INCENTIVE SAVINGS‑‑FY 2002. The sum of one hundred million dollars or so
much thereof as may be available on June 30, 2002, from the total amount of
unspent fiscal year 2002 state general fund appropriations is appropriated for
the purposes of RCW 43.79.460 in the manner provided in this section.

(1) Of the total
appropriated amount, one-half of that portion that is attributable to incentive
savings, not to exceed twenty-five million dollars, is appropriated to the
savings incentive account for the purpose of improving the quality, efficiency,
and effectiveness of agency services, and credited to the agency that generated
the savings.

(2) Of the total
appropriated amount, any amount attributable to unspent general fund‑-state
appropriations in the state need grant program, the state work study program,
the Washington scholars program, and the Washington award for vocational
excellence program is appropriated to the state financial aid account if
Substitute House Bill No. 2914 (state financial aid account) is enacted by June
30, 2002.

(3) The
remainder of the total amount, not to exceed seventy-five million dollars, is
appropriated to the education savings account.

(((3))) (4)
For purposes of this section, the total amount of unspent state general fund
appropriations does not include the appropriations made in this section or any
amounts included in across-the-board allotment reductions under RCW 43.88.110.

Sec. 716. 2001 2nd sp.s. c 7 s 724
(uncodified) is amended to read as follows:

INCENTIVE SAVINGS‑-FY 2003. The sum of one hundred million dollars or so
much thereof as may be available on June 30, 2003, from the total amount of
unspent fiscal year 2003 state general fund appropriations is appropriated for
the purposes of RCW 43.79.460 in the manner provided in this section.

(1) Of the total
appropriated amount, one-half of that portion that is attributable to incentive
savings, not to exceed twenty-five million dollars, is appropriated to the
savings incentive account for the purpose of improving the quality, efficiency,
and effectiveness of agency services, and credited to the agency that generated
the savings.

(2) Of the total
appropriated amount, any amount attributable to unspent general fund‑-state
appropriations in the state need grant program, the state work study program,
the Washington scholars program, and the Washington award for vocational
excellence program is appropriated to the state financial aid account if
Substitute House Bill No. 2914 (state financial aid account) is enacted by June
30, 2002.

(3) The
remainder of the total amount, not to exceed seventy-five million dollars, is
appropriated to the education savings account.

(((3))) (4)
For purposes of this section, the total amount of unspent state general fund
appropriations does not include the appropriations made in this section or any
amounts included in across-the-board allotment reductions under RCW 43.88.110.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
717. A new section is added
to 2001 2nd sp.s. c 7 (uncodified) to read as follows:

FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF
COMMUNITY, TRADE, AND ECONOMIC DEVELOPMENT‑-COUNTY ASSISTANCE

General Fund‑-State
Appropriation (FY 2003).... $ 1,392,000

TOTAL
APPROPRIATION................. $ 1,392,000

The appropriation in
this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations: The
director of community, trade, and economic development shall distribute the
appropriation in this section to the following counties in the amounts
designated:

Asotin County.................................. $ 7,000

Columbia County................................ $ 286,000

Ferry County................................... $ 199,000

Garfield County................................ $ 291,000

Lincoln County................................. $ 151,000

Pend Oreille County............................ $ 143,000

Skamania County................................ $ 56,000

Wahkiakum County............................... $ 259,000

TOTAL.......................................... $ 1,392,000

Sec. 718. 2001 2nd sp.s. c 7 s 727
(uncodified) is amended to read as follows:

FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF
COMMUNITY, TRADE, AND ECONOMIC DEVELOPMENT‑-COUNTY CORPORATION
ASSISTANCE

General Fund‑-State
Appropriation (FY 2002).... $ 24,410,534

((General Fund‑-State
Appropriation (FY 2003)... $........................................... 25,137,970

TOTAL
APPROPRIATION................. $ 49,548,504))

The appropriation((s))
in this section ((are)) is subject to the following conditions
and limitations:

(1)(a) The department
shall withhold distributions under subsection (2) of this section to any county
that has not paid its fifty percent share of the employer contribution on
behalf of superior court judges for insurance and health care plans and federal
social security and medicare and medical aid benefits for the fiscal year. As
required by Article IV, section 13 of the state Constitution and 1996 Attorney
General's Opinion No. 2, it is the intent of the legislature that the costs of
these employer contributions shall be shared equally between the state and
county or counties in which the judges serve.

(b) After receiving
written notification from the office of the administrator for the courts that a
county has paid its fifty percent share as required under (a) of this
subsection, the department shall distribute the amount designated for the
fiscal year under subsection (2) of this section.

(2) The director of
community, trade, and economic development shall distribute the appropriations
to the following counties in the amounts designated:

((2001-03))

County FY 2002 ((FY 2003 Biennium))

Adams 290,303 ((295,993
586,296))

Asotin 422,074 ((434,598
856,672))

Benton 966,480 ((999,163
1,965,643))

Chelan 637,688 ((651,982
1,289,670))

Clallam 444,419 ((454,391
898,810))

Clark 641,571 ((678,997
1,320,568))

Columbia 561,888 ((572,901
1,134,789))

Cowlitz 771,879 ((795,808
1,567,687))

Douglas 505,585 ((528,184
1,033,769))

Ferry 389,909 ((397,551
787,460))

Franklin 442,624 ((464,018
906,642))

Garfield 571,303 ((582,501
1,153,804))

Grant 579,631 ((604,072
1,183,703))

Grays Harbor 540,315 ((550,905
1,091,220))

Island 483,589 ((503,205
986,794))

Jefferson 239,914 ((249,924
489,838))

King 2,661,862 ((2,720,716
5,382,578))

Kitsap 469,992 ((480,178
950,170))

Kittitas 366,971 ((383,027
749,998))

Klickitat 204,726 ((217,555
422,281))

Lewis 583,702 ((598,004
1,181,706))

Lincoln 290,754 ((302,151
592,905))

Mason 905,060 ((930,959
1,836,019))

Okanogan 548,848 ((560,332
1,109,180))

Pacific 344,047 ((350,790
694,837))

Pend Oreille 280,342 ((285,837
566,179))

Pierce 1,246,530 ((1,284,087
2,530,617))

San Juan 85,712 ((91,859
177,571))

Skagit 911,491 ((944,914
1,856,405))

Skamania 172,840 ((176,228
349,068))

Snohomish 1,017,209 ((1,058,571
2,075,780))

Spokane 804,124 ((823,359
1,627,483))

Stevens 811,482 ((835,598
1,647,080))

Thurston 1,031,888 ((1,061,579
2,093,467))

Wahkiakum 507,528 ((517,476
1,025,004))

Walla Walla 241,341 ((247,105
488,446))

Whatcom 408,025 ((429,069
837,094))

Whitman 134,870 ((138,191
273,061))

Yakima 1,892,018 ((1,936,192
3,828,210))

TOTAL APPROPRIATIONS 24,410,534 ((25,137,970
49,548,504))

Sec. 719. 2001 2nd sp.s. c 7 s 728
(uncodified) is amended to read as follows:

FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF
COMMUNITY, TRADE, AND ECONOMIC DEVELOPMENT‑-MUNICIPAL CORPORATION ASSISTANCE

General Fund‑-State
Appropriation (FY 2002).... $ 45,884,610

((General Fund‑-State
Appropriation (FY 2003)... $........................................... 47,251,839

TOTAL
APPROPRIATION................. $ 93,136,449))

The appropriation((s))
in this section ((are)) is subject to the following conditions
and limitations:

(1) The director of
community, trade, and economic development shall distribute the appropriation
to the following cities and municipalities in the amounts designated:

((2001-03))

City FY 2002 ((FY 2003 Biennium))

Aberdeen 119,986 ((123,562 243,548))

Airway Heights 111,259 ((114,575 225,834))

Albion 66,339 ((68,316 134,655))

Algona 32,672 ((33,646 66,318))

Almira 12,519 ((12,892 25,411))

Anacortes 70,930 ((73,044 143,974))

Arlington 42,344 ((43,606 85,950))

Asotin 57,623 ((59,340 116,963))

Auburn 192,405 ((198,139 390,544))

Bainbridge Island 293,851 ((302,608 596,459))

Battle Ground 118,303 ((121,828 240,131))

Beaux Arts 1,784 ((1,837 3,621))

Bellevue 524,203 ((539,824 1,064,027))

Bellingham 369,121 ((380,121 749,242))

Benton City 111,380 ((114,699 226,079))

Bingen 6,602 ((6,799 13,401))

Black Diamond 254,698 ((262,288 516,986))

Blaine 20,853 ((21,474 42,327))

Bonney Lake 158,738 ((163,468 322,206))

Bothell 137,270 ((141,361 278,631))

Bremerton 214,020 ((220,398 434,418))

Brewster 11,250 ((11,585 22,835))

Bridgeport 188,216 ((193,825 382,041))

Brier 532,011 ((547,865 1,079,876))

Buckley 68,227 ((70,260 138,487))

Bucoda 52,876 ((54,452 107,328))

Burien 284,265 ((292,736 577,001))

Burlington 27,407 ((28,224 55,631))

Camas 53,654 ((55,253 108,907))

Carbonado 56,785 ((58,477 115,262))

Carnation 9,593 ((9,879 19,472))

Cashmere 120,801 ((124,401 245,202))

Castle Rock 29,980 ((30,873 60,853))

Cathlamet 6,265 ((6,452 12,717))

Centralia 101,426 ((104,448 205,874))

Chehalis 34,601 ((35,632 70,233))

Chelan 19,515 ((20,097 39,612))

Cheney 314,316 ((323,683 637,999))

Chewelah 66,731 ((68,720 135,451))

Clarkston 83,910 ((86,411 170,321))

Cle Elum 8,692 ((8,951 17,643))

Clyde Hill 136,778 ((140,854 277,632))

Colfax 74,672 ((76,897 151,569))

College Place 526,480 ((542,169 1,068,649))

Colton 27,473 ((28,292 55,765))

Colville 23,389 ((24,086 47,475))

Conconully 13,675 ((14,083 27,758))

Concrete 27,006 ((27,811 54,817))

Connell 164,950 ((169,866 334,816))

Cosmopolis 15,395 ((15,854 31,249))

Coulee City 2,804 ((2,888 5,692))

Coulee Dam 61,408 ((63,238 124,646))

Coupeville 7,708 ((7,938 15,646))

Covington 690,851 ((711,438 1,402,289))

Creston 12,905 ((13,290 26,195))

Cusick 9,341 ((9,619 18,960))

Darrington 59,838 ((61,621 121,459))

Davenport 66,350 ((68,327 134,677))

Dayton 92,685 ((95,447 188,132))

Deer Park 16,059 ((16,538 32,597))

Des Moines 1,482,120 ((1,526,287 3,008,407))

Dupont 8,109 ((8,351 16,460))

Duvall 66,128 ((68,099 134,227))

East Wenatchee 30,678 ((31,592 62,270))

Eatonville 8,848 ((9,112 17,960))

Edgewood 901,766 ((928,639 1,830,405))

Edmonds 456,336 ((469,935 926,271))

Electric City 87,243 ((89,843 177,086))

Ellensburg 81,982 ((84,425 166,407))

Elma 84,676 ((87,199 171,875))

Elmer City 29,811 ((30,699 60,510))

Endicott 28,758 ((29,615 58,373))

Entiat 58,244 ((59,980 118,224))

Enumclaw 53,013 ((54,593 107,606))

Ephrata 59,987 ((61,775 121,762))

Everett 495,428 ((510,192 1,005,620))

Everson 67,517 ((69,529 137,046))

Fairfield 18,540 ((19,092 37,632))

Farmington 12,072 ((12,432 24,504))

Federal Way 470,179 ((484,190 954,369))

Ferndale 74,669 ((76,894 151,563))

Fife 25,411 ((26,168 51,579))

Fircrest 386,146 ((397,653 783,799))

Forks 110,712 ((114,011 224,723))

Friday Harbor 9,791 ((10,083 19,874))

Garfield 45,263 ((46,612 91,875))

George 19,319 ((19,895 39,214))

Gig Harbor 31,615 ((32,557 64,172))

Gold Bar 134,531 ((138,540 273,071))

Goldendale 49,519 ((50,995 100,514))

Grand Coulee 5,805 ((5,978 11,783))

Grandview 256,347 ((263,986 520,333))

Granger 173,094 ((178,252 351,346))

Granite Falls 10,946 ((11,272 22,218))

Hamilton 17,437 ((17,957 35,394))

Harrah 46,947 ((48,346 95,293))

Harrington 18,107 ((18,647 36,754))

Hartline 11,392 ((11,731 23,123))

Hatton 12,176 ((12,539 24,715))

Hoquiam 374,903 ((386,075 760,978))

Hunts Point 2,432 ((2,504 4,936))

Ilwaco 13,150 ((13,542 26,692))

Index 4,181 ((4,306 8,487))

Ione 17,566 ((18,089 35,655))

Issaquah 50,002 ((51,492 101,494))

Kahlotus 20,210 ((20,812 41,022))

Kalama 7,892 ((8,127 16,019))

Kelso 68,904 ((70,957 139,861))

Kenmore 1,099,395 ((1,132,157 2,231,552))

Kennewick 293,534 ((302,281 595,815))

Kent 360,624 ((371,371 731,995))

Kettle Falls 64,422 ((66,342 130,764))

Kirkland 221,429 ((228,028 449,457))

Kittitas 72,698 ((74,864 147,562))

Krupp 4,445 ((4,577 9,022))

La Center 34,415 ((35,441 69,856))

La Conner 3,817 ((3,931 7,748))

La Crosse 20,141 ((20,741 40,882))

Lacey 143,243 ((147,512 290,755))

Lake Forest Park 897,932 ((924,690 1,822,622))

Lake Stevens 142,295 ((146,535 288,830))

Lakewood 2,955,109 ((3,043,171 5,998,280))

Lamont 7,492 ((7,715 15,207))

Langley 5,303 ((5,461 10,764))

Latah 11,962 ((12,318 24,280))

Leavenworth 12,189 ((12,552 24,741))

Lind 2,217 ((2,283 4,500))

Long Beach 10,269 ((10,575 20,844))

Longview 249,836 ((257,281 507,117))

Lyman 16,741 ((17,240 33,981))

Lynden 42,717 ((43,990 86,707))

Lynnwood 163,579 ((168,454 332,033))

Mabton 142,491 ((146,737 289,228))

Malden 21,588 ((22,231 43,819))

Mansfield 26,744 ((27,541 54,285))

Maple Valley 359,478 ((370,190 729,668))

Marcus 14,126 ((14,547 28,673))

Marysville 102,028 ((105,068 207,096))

Mattawa 100,064 ((103,046 203,110))

McCleary 105,807 ((108,960 214,767))

Medical Lake 114,323 ((117,730 232,053))

Medina 14,355 ((14,783 29,138))

Mercer Island 383,527 ((394,956 778,483))

Mesa 16,835 ((17,337 34,172))

Metaline 14,150 ((14,572 28,722))

Metaline Falls 7,718 ((7,948 15,666))

Mill Creek 174,495 ((179,695 354,190))

Millwood 22,619 ((23,293 45,912))

Milton 28,030 ((28,865 56,895))

Monroe 56,517 ((58,201 114,718))

Montesano 60,229 ((62,024 122,253))

Morton 5,891 ((6,067 11,958))

Moses Lake 105,670 ((108,819 214,489))

Mossyrock 16,545 ((17,038 33,583))

Mount Vernon 130,780 ((134,677 265,457))

Mountlake Terrace 711,188 ((732,381 1,443,569))

Moxee 40,448 ((41,653 82,101))

Mukilteo 274,482 ((282,662 557,144))

Naches 7,632 ((7,859 15,491))

Napavine 96,030 ((98,892 194,922))

Nespelem 17,614 ((18,139 35,753))

Newcastle 290,801 ((299,467 590,268))

Newport 13,223 ((13,617 26,840))

Nooksack 58,178 ((59,912 118,090))

Normandy Park 489,113 ((503,689 992,802))

North Bend 20,754 ((21,372 42,126))

North Bonneville 30,574 ((31,485 62,059))

Northport 23,489 ((24,189 47,678))

Oak Harbor 278,157 ((286,446 564,603))

Oakesdale 31,060 ((31,986 63,046))

Oakville 43,411 ((44,705 88,116))

Ocean Shores 64,837 ((66,769 131,606))

Odessa 4,721 ((4,862 9,583))

Okanogan 12,323 ((12,690 25,013))

Olympia 198,476 ((204,391 402,867))

Omak 26,117 ((26,895 53,012))

Oroville 12,506 ((12,879 25,385))

Orting 191,211 ((196,909 388,120))

Othello 26,808 ((27,607 54,415))

Pacific 69,124 ((71,184 140,308))

Palouse 55,067 ((56,708 111,775))

Pasco 131,298 ((135,211 266,509))

Pateros 28,021 ((28,856 56,877))

Pe Ell 54,800 ((56,433 111,233))

Pomeroy 52,485 ((54,049 106,534))

Port Angeles 124,595 ((128,308 252,903))

Port Orchard 41,797 ((43,043 84,840))

Port Townsend 47,126 ((48,530 95,656))

Poulsbo 31,812 ((32,760 64,572))

Prescott 12,349 ((12,717 25,066))

Prosser 24,137 ((24,856 48,993))

Pullman 584,659 ((602,082 1,186,741))

Puyallup 151,732 ((156,254 307,986))

Quincy 20,244 ((20,847 41,091))

Rainier 111,521 ((114,844 226,365))

Raymond 85,311 ((87,853 173,164))

Reardan 38,184 ((39,322 77,506))

Redmond 215,259 ((221,674 436,933))

Renton 235,053 ((242,058 477,111))

Republic 25,085 ((25,833 50,918))

Richland 441,733 ((454,897 896,630))

Ridgefield 55,637 ((57,295 112,932))

Ritzville 8,498 ((8,751 17,249))

Riverside 27,204 ((28,015 55,219))

Rock Island 36,527 ((37,616 74,143))

Rockford 18,965 ((19,530 38,495))

Rosalia 36,719 ((37,813 74,532))

Roslyn 64,571 ((66,495 131,066))

Roy 1,709 ((1,760 3,469))

Royal City 66,657 ((68,643 135,300))

Ruston 50,309 ((51,808 102,117))

Sammamish 2,361,433 ((2,431,804 4,793,237))

Seatac 132,183 ((136,122 268,305))

Seattle 3,189,346 ((3,284,389 6,473,735))

Sedro-Woolley 54,896 ((56,532 111,428))

Selah 80,704 ((83,109 163,813))

Sequim 21,867 ((22,519 44,386))

Shelton 58,160 ((59,893 118,053))

Shoreline 1,485,138 ((1,529,395 3,014,533))

Skykomish 1,417 ((1,459 2,876))

Snohomish 40,722 ((41,936 82,658))

Snoqualmie 9,587 ((9,873 19,460))

Soap Lake 102,783 ((105,846 208,629))

South Bend 75,826 ((78,086 153,912))

South Cle Elum 46,847 ((48,243 95,090))

South Prairie 18,788 ((19,348 38,136))

Spangle 1,397 ((1,439 2,836))

Spokane 1,116,419 ((1,149,688 2,266,107))

Sprague 22,930 ((23,613 46,543))

Springdale 11,080 ((11,410 22,490))

St. John 4,245 ((4,372 8,617))

Stanwood 21,141 ((21,771 42,912))

Starbuck 8,949 ((9,216 18,165))

Steilacoom 285,807 ((294,324 580,131))

Stevenson 11,673 ((12,021 23,694))

Sultan 63,199 ((65,082 128,281))

Sumas 7,885 ((8,120 16,005))

Sumner 41,931 ((43,181 85,112))

Sunnyside 70,805 ((72,915 143,720))

Tacoma 1,384,646 ((1,425,908 2,810,554))

Tekoa 49,373 ((50,844 100,217))

Tenino 68,820 ((70,871 139,691))

Tieton 74,506 ((76,726 151,232))

Toledo 8,084 ((8,325 16,409))

Tonasket 5,500 ((5,664 11,164))

Toppenish 443,488 ((456,704 900,192))

Tukwila 75,320 ((77,565 152,885))

Tumwater 61,848 ((63,691 125,539))

Twisp 4,793 ((4,936 9,729))

Union Gap 27,129 ((27,937 55,066))

Uniontown 19,805 ((20,395 40,200))

University Place 1,889,912 ((1,946,231 3,836,143))

Vader 40,643 ((41,854 82,497))

Vancouver 1,177,584 ((1,212,676 2,390,260))

Waitsburg 81,097 ((83,514 164,611))

Walla Walla 318,679 ((328,176 646,855))

Wapato 230,783 ((237,660 468,443))

Warden 105,612 ((108,759 214,371))

Washougal 177,022 ((182,297 359,319))

Washtucna 20,654 ((21,269 41,923))

Waterville 72,880 ((75,052 147,932))

Waverly 10,256 ((10,562 20,818))

Wenatchee 147,602 ((152,001 299,603))

West Richland 489,752 ((504,347 994,099))

Westport 13,715 ((14,124 27,839))

White Salmon 53,746 ((55,348 109,094))

Wilbur 23,614 ((24,318 47,932))

Wilkeson 18,762 ((19,321 38,083))

Wilson Creek 18,403 ((18,951 37,354))

Winlock 35,212 ((36,261 71,473))

Winthrop 1,756 ((1,808 3,564))

Woodinville 56,052 ((57,722 113,774))

Woodland 17,960 ((18,495 36,455))

Woodway 12,513 ((12,886 25,399))

Yacolt 36,636 ((37,728 74,364))

Yakima 487,766 ((502,301 990,067))

Yarrow Point 32,121 ((33,078 65,199))

Yelm 15,677 ((16,144 31,821))

Zillah 100,818 ((103,822 204,640))

TOTAL APPROPRIATIONS 45,545,942 ((46,903,217 92,449,159))

(2) $338,668 for fiscal
year 2002 ((and $348,622 for fiscal year 2003)) from this appropriation
((are)) is provided solely to address the contingencies listed in
this subsection. The department shall distribute the moneys no later than
March 31, 2002, ((and March 31, 2003,)) for the respective
appropriations. Moneys shall be distributed for the following purposes, ranked
in order of priority:

(a) To correct for data
errors in the determination of distributions in subsection (1) of this section;

(b) To distribute to
newly qualifying jurisdictions as if the jurisdiction had been in existence
prior to November 1999;

(c) To allocate under
emergency situations as determined by the director of the department of
community, trade, and economic development in consultation with the association
of Washington cities; and

(d) After April 1((st
of each year in the fiscal biennium ending June 30, 2003)), 2001,
any moneys remaining from the amounts provided in this subsection shall be
prorated and distributed to cities and towns on the basis of the amounts
distributed for emergency considerations in November 2000 as provided in
section 729, chapter 1, Laws of 2000, 2nd sp. sess.

Sec. 720. 2001 2nd sp.s. c 7 s 729
(uncodified) is amended to read as follows:

FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF
COMMUNITY, TRADE, AND ECONOMIC DEVELOPMENT‑-COUNTY PUBLIC HEALTH
ASSISTANCE

Health Services Account‑-State
Appropriation... $ ((48,270,802))

36,025,651

The appropriation in
this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations: The
director of the department of community, trade, and economic development shall
distribute the appropriations to the following counties and health districts in
the amounts designated:

2001-03

Health District FY 2002 FY 2003 Biennium

Adams County Health District 30,824 ((31,428)) 15,714 ((62,252))
46,538

Asotin County Health District 65,375 ((70,818)) 35,409 ((136,193))
100,784

Benton-Franklin Health District 1,147,987 ((1,196,390)) 598,195 ((2,344,377))
1,746,182

Chelan-Douglas Health District 176,979 ((194,628)) 97,314 ((371,607))
274,293

Clallam County Health and Human Services Department 140,557 ((144,547))
72,274 ((285,104)) 212,831

Southwest Washington Health District 1,067,962 ((1,113,221)) 556,611 ((2,181,183))
1,624,573

Columbia County Health District 40,362 ((41,153)) 20,577 ((81,515))
60,939

Cowlitz County Health Department 273,147 ((287,116)) 143,558 ((560,263))
416,705

Garfield County Health District 14,966 ((15,259)) 7,630 ((30,225))
22,596

Grant County Health District 111,767 ((126,762)) 63,381 ((238,529))
175,148

Grays Harbor Health Department 183,113 ((186,702)) 93,351 ((369,815))
276,464

Island County Health Department 86,600 ((98,221)) 49,111 ((184,821))
135,711

Jefferson County Health and Human Services 82,856 ((89,676)) 44,838 ((172,532))
127,694

Seattle-King County Department of Public Health 9,489,273 ((9,681,772))
4,840,886 ((19,171,045)) 14,330,159

Bremerton-Kitsap County Health District 551,913 ((563,683)) 281,842 ((1,115,596))
833,755

Kittitas County Health Department 87,822 ((98,219)) 49,110 ((186,041))
136,932

Klickitat County Health Department 57,872 ((67,636)) 33,818 ((125,508))
91,690

Lewis County Health Department 103,978 ((108,817)) 54,409 ((212,795))
158,387

Lincoln County Health Department 26,821 ((32,924)) 16,462 ((59,745))
43,283

Mason County Department of Health Services 91,638 ((101,422)) 50,711 ((193,060))
142,349

Okanogan County Health District 62,844 ((64,788)) 32,394 ((127,632))
95,238

Pacific County Health Department 77,108 ((78,619)) 39,310 ((155,727))
116,418

Tacoma-Pierce County Health Department 2,802,613 ((2,870,392)) 1,435,196 ((5,673,005))
4,237,809

San Juan County Health and Community Services 35,211 ((40,274)) 20,137 ((75,485))
55,348

Skagit County Health Department 215,464 ((234,917)) 117,459 ((450,381))
332,923

Snohomish Health District 2,238,523 ((2,303,371)) 1,151,686 ((4,541,894))
3,390,209

Spokane County Health District 2,091,092 ((2,135,477)) 1,067,739 ((4,226,569))
3,158,831

Northeast Tri-County Health District 106,019 ((116,135)) 58,068 ((222,154))
164,087

Thurston County Health Department 593,358 ((614,255)) 307,128 ((1,207,613))
900,486

Wahkiakum County Health Department 13,715 ((13,984)) 6,992 ((27,699))
20,707

Walla Walla County-City Health Department 170,852 ((175,213)) 87,607 ((346,065))
258,459

Whatcom County Health Department 846,015 ((875,369)) 437,685 ((1,721,384))
1,283,700

Whitman County Health Department 78,081 ((80,274)) 40,137 ((158,355))
118,218

Yakima Health District 617,792 ((636,841)) 318,421 ((1,254,633))
936,213

TOTAL APPROPRIATIONS $23,780,499 (($24,490,303)) $12,245,152 (($48,270,802))
$36,025,651

Sec. 721. 2001 2nd sp.s. c 7 s 730
(uncodified) is amended to read as follows:

FOR THE LIABILITY ACCOUNT

General Fund‑-State
Appropriation (FY 2002)......... $ 12,000,000

General Fund‑-State
Appropriation (FY 2003)......... $ ((6,392,000))

19,392,000

((State Surplus Assets
Reserve Fund‑-State

Appropriation................................... $ 25,000,000))

TOTAL
APPROPRIATION...................... $ 31,392,000

The appropriations in
this section are provided solely for deposit in the liability account.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
722. A new section is added
to 2001 2nd sp.s. c 7 (uncodified) to read as follows:

REVOLVING FUND
REDUCTIONS

The office of financial
management shall reduce the allotments for agencies of the state by $4,710,000
from the general fund‑-state fiscal year 2003 appropriations and
$5,173,000 from other funds 2001-03 appropriations. Reductions shall be made
according to the legislative evaluation and audit committee document entitled,
"Revolving Fund Reductions," dated March 7, 2002.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
723. A new section is added
to 2001 2nd sp.s. c 7 (uncodified) to read as follows:

MADER SETTLEMENT

General Fund‑-State
Appropriation (FY 2003).... $ 12,000,000

The appropriation in
this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations: The
entire appropriation is provided solely for the purposes of the settlement
costs of Mader v. State litigation regarding retirement contributions on
behalf of part-time faculty.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
724. A new section is added
to 2001 2nd sp.s. c 7 (uncodified) to read as follows:

FOR SUNDRY CLAIMS. The following sums, or so much thereof as may
be necessary, are appropriated from the general fund, unless otherwise
indicated, for relief of various individuals, firms, and corporations for
sundry claims. These appropriations are to be disbursed on vouchers approved
by the director of general administration, except as otherwise provided, as
follows:

(1) Reimbursement of
criminal defendants acquitted on the basis of self-defense, pursuant to RCW
9A.16.110:

(a) Eythor Westman,
claim number SCJ 02-01........... $ 7,000

(b) Stacey Julian,
claim number SCJ 02-02............. $ 59,136

(c) Christopher Denney,
claim number SCJ 02-03........ $ 11,598

(d) Onofre Vasquez,
claim number SCJ 02-04........... $ 200

(e) William Voorhees,
claim number SCJ 02-05......... $ 3,694

(f) Glenn Rowlison,
claim number SCJ 02-06........... $ 14,395

(g) Frankie Doerr,
claim number SCJ 02-07............. $ 9,100

(h) Ralph Howard, claim
number SCJ 00-09............. $ 99,497

(i) Johnny Adams, claim
number SCJ 01-17............. $ 11,916

(j) Shane Mathus, claim
number SCJ 02-08............. $ 13,043

(k) Timothy Farnum,
claim number SCJ 02-09........... $ 21,822

(l) Rebecca Williams,
claim number SCJ 02-10......... $ 2,241

(m) Stewart Bailey,
claim number SCJ 02-11........... $ 4,186

(n) Aaron Knaack, claim
number SCJ 02-13............. $ 4,330

(o) Jacob Clark, claim
number SCJ 02-14.............. $ 11,613

(2) Payment from the
state wildlife account for damage to crops by wildlife, pursuant to RCW
77.36.050:

(a) Ronald Palmer,
claim number SCG 02-01............. $ 1,522

(b) Keith Morris, claim
number SCG 02-02............. $ 1,315

(c) Edgar Roush, claim
number SCG 02-03.............. $ 1,459

NEW SECTION. Sec.
725. A new section is added
to 2001 2nd sp.s. c 7 (uncodified) to read as follows:

CONTINGENCY POOL. The sum of two hundred and fourteen thousand
dollars from the general fund‑-state for fiscal year 2003 is appropriated
to the supreme court for providing assistance to judicial branch agencies that
are unable to effectively absorb the administrative, travel, and equipment
reductions and efficiency savings enacted in this act. Allocations to judicial
agencies from this appropriation shall be reported to the legislative fiscal
committees by the office of financial management within five days of the
allocation.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
726. A new section is added
to 2001 2nd sp.s. c 7 (uncodified) to read as follows:

EFFICIENCY SAVINGS. The legislature finds that all state agencies
must continue to strive to make their operations more efficient and effective.
During periods of economic downturn, the need to reduce costs while still
maintaining vital services is especially critical. It is the intent of the
legislature that all agencies work to reduce costs while minimizing the impact
on services to the public by taking the following actions:

(1) Imposing a hiring
freeze for all positions except those that directly serve public safety and
essential health and welfare activities of state government;

(2) Delaying equipment
purchases unless that equipment is essential to performing the mission of the
agency;

(3) Avoiding all travel
unless that travel is essential to performing the mission of the agency;

(4) Avoiding personal
services contracts unless those contracts are essential to performing the
mission of the agency; and

(5) Identifying and
implementing other administrative efficiencies.

When requested,
agencies are expected to be able to identify, for each action, the level of
savings achieved each fiscal quarter compared to the level of administrative
and efficiency savings assumed in this act.

Individual
agencies' appropriations for the 2001-2003 biennium have been reduced to
reflect the efficiencies assumed in this section.

(End
of part)

PART
VIII

OTHER TRANSFERS AND
APPROPRIATIONS

Sec. 801. 2001 2nd sp.s. c 7 s 801
(uncodified) is amended to read as follows:

FOR THE STATE TREASURER‑-STATE REVENUES FOR
DISTRIBUTION

General Fund Appropriation
for fire insurance

premium distributions.................. ... $ ((6,528,600))

7,526,000

General Fund Appropriation
for public utility

district excise tax
distributions.......... $ ((36,427,306))

34,754,723

General Fund Appropriation
for prosecuting

attorney distributions..................... $ ((3,090,000))

3,110,000

General Fund Appropriation
for boating safety/

education and law
enforcement

distributions.............................. $ 3,780,000

General Fund Appropriation
for other tax

distributions.............................. $ ((39,566))

1,951,556

Death Investigations
Account Appropriation for

distribution to
counties for publicly

funded autopsies........................... $ 1,621,537

Aquatic Lands Enhancement
Account Appropriation

for harbor improvement
revenue

distribution............................... $ 147,500

Timber Tax Distribution
Account Appropriation for

distribution to
"timber" counties.......... $ ((68,562,000))

57,405,000

County Criminal Justice
Assistance

Appropriation.............................. $ 49,835,213

Municipal Criminal Justice
Assistance

Appropriation.............................. $ 19,988,097

Liquor Excise Tax Account
Appropriation for

liquor excise tax
distribution............. $ 28,659,331

Liquor Revolving Account
Appropriation for

liquor profits
distribution................ $ 55,344,817

TOTAL
APPROPRIATION................. $ ((274,023,967))

264,124,506

The total expenditures
from the state treasury under the appropriations in this section shall not
exceed the funds available under statutory distributions for the stated
purposes.

Sec. 802. 2001 2nd sp.s. c 7 s 805
(uncodified) is amended to read as follows:

FOR THE STATE TREASURER‑-TRANSFERS

For transfers in
this section to the state general fund, pursuant to RCW 43.135.035(5), the
state expenditure limit shall be increased by the amount of the transfer. The
increase shall occur in the fiscal year in which the transfer occurs.

Public Facilities
Construction Loan and

Grant Revolving
Account: For transfer

to the digital
government revolving account

on or before December
31, 2001............. $ 1,418,456

Financial Services
Regulation Fund: To be

transferred from the
financial services

regulation fund to the
digital government

revolving account
during the period

between July 1, 2001,
and December 31,

2001....................................... $ 2,000,000

Financial Services
Regulation Fund: For

transfer to the
state general fund,

$2,250,000 for
fiscal year 2002 and

$357,000 for fiscal
year 2003.............. $ 2,607,000

Local Toxics Control
Account: For transfer

to the state toxics
control account.

Transferred funds will
be utilized

for methamphetamine lab
cleanup, to

address areawide soil
contamination

problems, and clean up
contaminated

sites as part of the
clean sites

initiative................................. $ 6,000,000

State Toxics Control
Account: For transfer

to the water quality
account for water

quality related
projects funded in the

capital budget............................. $ 9,000,000

General Fund: For transfer
to the flood

control assistance
account.................. $ 4,000,000

Water Quality Account: For
transfer to the

water pollution control
account. Transfers

shall be made at
intervals coinciding with

deposits of federal
capitalization grant

money into the
account. The amounts

transferred shall not
exceed the match

required for each
federal deposit.......... $ 12,564,487

Health Services
Account: For transfer to

the water quality
account.................. $ 6,447,500

Health Services
Account: For transfer to the

violence reduction
and drug enforcement

account.................................... $ 6,497,500

Health Services
Account: For transfer to the

tobacco prevention
and control account..... $ 22,019,000

State Treasurer's Service
Account: For

transfer to the general
fund on or

before June 30, 2003,
an amount in excess

of the cash
requirements of the state

treasurer's service
account. Pursuant to

RCW 43.135.035(5), the
state expenditure

limit shall be
increased by $4,000,000 in

fiscal year 2002 and
by $8,715,000 in fiscal

year 2003 to reflect
this transfer......... $ ((8,000,000))

12,715,000

Public Works Assistance
Account: For

transfer to the
drinking water

assistance account......................... $ 7,700,000

Tobacco Settlement
Account: For transfer

to the health services
account, in an

amount not to exceed
the actual balance

of the tobacco
settlement account.......... $ ((310,000,000))

280,000,000

General Fund: For transfer
to the water quality

account.................................... $ ((60,325,000))

60,821,172

Insurance Commissioner's
Regulatory Account:

For transfer to the
state general fund for

fiscal year 2003........................... $ 721,000

Electrical License
Account: For transfer to the

state general fund
for fiscal year 2003.... $ 426,000

State Drought
Preparedness Account: For

transfer to the
state general fund for

fiscal year 2002........................... $ 3,000,000

Health Services Account:
For

transfer to the state
general fund

by June 30, 2002.
Pursuant to RCW

43.135.035(5), the
state expenditure

limit shall be
increased in fiscal

year 2002 to reflect
this transfer......... $ 130,000,000

((Health Services
Account: For

transfer to the
state general fund

by June 30, 2003.
Pursuant to RCW

43.135.035(5), the
state expenditure

limit shall be
increased in fiscal

year 2003 to reflect
this transfer......... $ 20,000,000

State Surplus Assets
Reserve Fund: For

transfer to the
multimodal transportation

account by June 30,
2002................... $ 70,000,000))

General Fund: For
transfer to the health

services account on
June 28, 2003.

Pursuant to RCW
43.135.035(5), the

state expenditure
limit shall be

decreased in fiscal
year 2003 to

reflect this
transfer...................... $ 130,000,000

Health Services
Account: For transfer to the

state general fund
for fiscal year 2003.... $ 12,245,000

Health Professions
Account: For transfer to the

state general fund
for fiscal year 2003.... $ 574,000

Industrial Insurance
Premium Refund Account: For

transfer to the
state general fund for fiscal

year 2002.................................. $ 1,000,000

Multimodal Transportation
Account: For

transfer to the state
general fund

by June 30, 2002.
Pursuant to RCW

43.135.035(5), the
state expenditure

limit shall be
increased in fiscal

year 2002 to reflect
this transfer......... $ 70,000,000

Horticultural Districts
Account: For

transfer to the
fruit and vegetable

inspection account......................... $ 11,075,000

Agricultural Local
Account: For transfer

to the fruit and
vegetable inspection

account.................................... $ 605,000

Lottery Administrative
Account: For transfer

to the state general
fund for fiscal

year 2003.................................. $ 335,000

Gambling Revolving
Account: For transfer

to the state general
fund for fiscal

year 2003.................................. $ 2,450,000

Liquor Control Board
Construction and

Maintenance
Account: For transfer

to the state general
fund for fiscal

year 2003.................................. $ 1,067,000

Liquor Revolving
Account: For transfer

to the state general
fund for fiscal

year 2003.................................. $ 2,059,000

Public Service Revolving
Account: For transfer

to the state general
fund for fiscal

year 2003.................................. $ 406,000

Nisqually Earthquake
Account: For transfer to

the disaster
response account for fire

suppression and
mobilization costs......... $ 32,698,000

Enhanced 911 Account:
For transfer to

the state general
fund for fiscal

year 2003.................................. $ 6,000,000

Clarke-McNary Fund: For
transfer to the state

general fund for
fiscal year 2002.......... $ 4,000,000

Tobacco Prevention and
Control Account:

For transfer to the
state general fund,

$7,102,000 for
fiscal year 2002 and

$14,125,000 for
fiscal year 2003........... $ 21,227,000

From the Emergency
Reserve Fund:

For transfer to the
state general fund

on June 28, 2002........................... $ 300,000,000

For transfer to the
state general fund

on June 28, 2003........................... $ 75,000,000

These
transfers from the emergency reserve fund shall occur only if legislation is
enacted by June 28, 2002, amending RCW 43.135.045 to authorize these transfers
to occur with a majority vote of both houses of the legislature. If such
legislation is not enacted by June 28, 2002, these transfers from the emergency
reserve fund shall not occur. These transfers do not increase the state
expenditure limit.

(End
of part)

PART
IX

MISCELLANEOUS

Sec. 901. RCW 9.46.100 and 1991
sp.s. c 16 s 917 are each amended to read as follows:

There is hereby created
the gambling revolving fund which shall consist of all moneys receivable for
licensing, penalties, forfeitures, and all other moneys, income, or revenue
received by the commission. The state treasurer shall be custodian of the
fund. All moneys received by the commission or any employee thereof, except
for change funds and an amount of petty cash as fixed by rule or regulation of
the commission, shall be deposited each day in a depository approved by the
state treasurer and transferred to the state treasurer to be credited to the
gambling revolving fund. Disbursements from the revolving fund shall be on
authorization of the commission or a duly authorized representative thereof.
In order to maintain an effective expenditure and revenue control the gambling
revolving fund shall be subject in all respects to chapter 43.88 RCW but no
appropriation shall be required to permit expenditures and payment of
obligations from such fund. All expenses relative to commission business,
including but not limited to salaries and expenses of the director and other
commission employees shall be paid from the gambling revolving fund.

((The state
treasurer shall transfer to the general fund one million dollars from the
gambling revolving fund for the 1991‑93 fiscal biennium.)) During
the 2001-2003 fiscal biennium, the legislature may transfer from the gambling
revolving fund to the state general fund such amounts as reflect the excess
fund balance of the fund and reductions made by the 2002 supplemental
appropriations act for administrative efficiencies and savings.

Sec. 902. RCW 19.28.351 and 1988 c
81 s 11 are each amended to read as follows:

All sums received from
licenses, permit fees, or other sources, herein shall be paid to the state
treasurer and placed in a special fund designated as the "electrical
license fund," and by him paid out upon vouchers duly and regularly issued
therefor and approved by the director of labor and industries or the director's
designee following determination by the board that the sums are necessary to
accomplish the intent of chapter 19.28 RCW. The treasurer shall keep an
accurate record of payments into, or receipts of, said fund, and of all
disbursements therefrom. During the 2001-03 fiscal biennium, the
legislature may transfer from the electrical license fund such amounts as
reflect the appropriations reductions made by the 2002 supplemental
appropriations act for administrative efficiencies and savings.

Sec. 903. RCW 38.52.106 and 2001 c
5 s 2 are each amended to read as follows:

The Nisqually
earthquake account is created in the state treasury. Moneys may be placed in
the account from tax revenues, budget transfers or appropriations, federal
appropriations, gifts, or any other lawful source. Moneys in the account may
be spent only after appropriation. Moneys in the account shall be used only to
support state and local government disaster response and recovery efforts
associated with the Nisqually earthquake. During the 2001-2003 fiscal
biennium, the legislature may transfer moneys from the Nisqually earthquake
account to the disaster response account for fire suppression and mobilization
costs.

Sec. 904. RCW 38.52.540 and 2001 c
128 s 2 are each amended to read as follows:

The enhanced 911
account is created in the state treasury. All receipts from the state enhanced
911 excise tax imposed by RCW 82.14B.030 shall be deposited into the account.
Moneys in the account shall be used only to support the statewide coordination
and management of the enhanced 911 system and to help supplement, within
available funds, the operational costs of the system. Funds shall not be
distributed to any county that has not imposed the maximum county enhanced 911
taxes allowed under RCW 82.14B.030 (1) and (2). The state enhanced 911
coordinator, with the advice and assistance of the enhanced 911 advisory
committee, is authorized to enter into statewide agreements to improve the
efficiency of enhanced 911 services for all counties and shall specify by rule
the additional purposes for which moneys, if available, may be expended from
this account. During the 2001-2003 fiscal biennium, the legislature may
transfer from the enhanced 911 account to the state general fund such amounts
as reflect the excess fund balance of the account.

Sec. 905. RCW 43.10.220 and 1999 c
309 s 916 are each amended to read as follows:

The attorney general is
authorized to expend from the antitrust revolving fund, created by RCW
43.10.210 through 43.10.220, such funds as are necessary for the payment of
costs, expenses and charges incurred in the preparation, institution and
maintenance of antitrust actions under the state and federal antitrust acts.
During the ((1999-01)) 2001-03 fiscal biennium, the attorney
general may expend ((up to one million three hundred thousand dollars))
from the antitrust revolving fund for the purposes of ((implementing a case
management data processing system for the centralized management of cases and
workload, including antitrust and other complex litigation)) the
consumer protection activities of the office.

Sec. 906. RCW 43.30.360 and 1986 c
100 s 46 are each amended to read as follows:

The department and
Washington State University may each receive funds from the federal government
in connection with cooperative work with the United States department of
agriculture, authorized by sections 4 and 5 of the Clarke-McNary act of
congress, approved June 7, 1924, providing for the procurement, protection, and
distribution of forestry seed and plants for the purpose of establishing
windbreaks, shelter belts, and farm wood lots and to assist the owners of farms
in establishing, improving, and renewing wood lots, shelter belts, and windbreaks;
and are authorized to disburse such funds as needed. During the 2001-2003
fiscal biennium, the legislature may transfer from the Clarke-McNary fund to
the state general fund such amounts as reflect the excess fund balance of the
Clarke-McNary fund.

Sec. 907. RCW 43.70.320 and 1993 c
492 s 411 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) There is created in
the state treasury an account to be known as the health professions account.
All fees received by the department for health professions licenses,
registration, certifications, renewals, or examinations and the civil penalties
assessed and collected by the department under RCW 18.130.190 shall be
forwarded to the state treasurer who shall credit such moneys to the health professions
account.

(2) All expenses
incurred in carrying out the health professions licensing activities of the
department shall be paid from the account as authorized by legislative
appropriation. Any residue in the account shall be accumulated and shall not
revert to the general fund at the end of the biennium. During the 2001-2003
fiscal biennium, the legislature may transfer from the health professions
account to the state general fund such amounts as reflect the reductions made
by the 2002 supplemental appropriations act for administrative efficiencies and
savings.

(3) The secretary shall
biennially prepare a budget request based on the anticipated costs of
administering the health professions licensing activities of the department
which shall include the estimated income from health professions fees.

Sec. 908. RCW 43.79.480 and 1999 c
309 s 927 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) Moneys received by
the state of Washington in accordance with the settlement of the state's legal
action against tobacco product manufacturers, exclusive of costs and attorneys'
fees, shall be deposited in the tobacco settlement account created in this
section.

(2) The tobacco
settlement account is created in the state treasury. Moneys in the tobacco
settlement account may only be transferred to the health services account for
the purposes set forth in RCW 43.72.900, and to the tobacco prevention and control
account for purposes set forth in this section.

(3) The tobacco
prevention and control account is created in the state treasury. The source of
revenue for this account is moneys transferred to the account from the tobacco
settlement account, investment earnings, donations to the account, and other
revenues as directed by law. Expenditures from the account are subject to
appropriation. During the 2001-2003 fiscal biennium, the legislature may
transfer from the tobacco prevention and control account to the state general
fund.

(4) The state treasurer
shall transfer one hundred million dollars from the tobacco settlement account
to the tobacco prevention and control account upon authorization of the
director of financial management. The director shall authorize transfer of the
total amount by June 30, 2001.

Sec. 909. RCW 43.83B.430 and 1999
c 379 s 921 are each amended to read as follows:

The state drought
preparedness account is created in the state treasury. All receipts from
appropriated funds designated for the account and funds transferred from the
state emergency water projects revolving account must be deposited into the
account. Moneys in the account may be spent only after appropriation.
Expenditures from the account may be used only for drought preparedness. During
the 2001-2003 fiscal biennium, the legislature may transfer from the state
drought preparedness account to the state general fund such amounts as reflect
the excess fund balance of the account.

Sec. 910. RCW 43.88.030 and 2000
2nd sp.s. c 4 s 12 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) The director of
financial management shall provide all agencies with a complete set of
instructions for submitting biennial budget requests to the director at least
three months before agency budget documents are due into the office of
financial management. The director shall provide agencies and committees that
are required under RCW 44.40.070 to develop comprehensive six-year program and
financial plans with a complete set of instructions for submitting these
program and financial plans at the same time that instructions for submitting
other budget requests are provided. The budget document or documents shall
consist of the governor's budget message which shall be explanatory of the
budget and shall contain an outline of the proposed financial policies of the
state for the ensuing fiscal period, as well as an outline of the proposed
six-year financial policies where applicable, and shall describe in connection
therewith the important features of the budget. The message shall set forth
the reasons for salient changes from the previous fiscal period in expenditure
and revenue items and shall explain any major changes in financial policy.
Attached to the budget message shall be such supporting schedules, exhibits and
other explanatory material in respect to both current operations and capital
improvements as the governor shall deem to be useful to the legislature. The
budget document or documents shall set forth a proposal for expenditures in the
ensuing fiscal period, or six-year period where applicable, based upon the
estimated revenues and caseloads as approved by the economic and revenue
forecast council and caseload forecast council or upon the estimated revenues
and caseloads of the office of financial management for those funds, accounts,
sources, and programs for which the forecast councils do not prepare an
official forecast, including those revenues anticipated to support the six-year
programs and financial plans under RCW 44.40.070. In estimating revenues to
support financial plans under RCW 44.40.070, the office of financial management
shall rely on information and advice from the transportation revenue forecast
council. Revenues shall be estimated for such fiscal period from the source
and at the rates existing by law at the time of submission of the budget
document, including the supplemental budgets submitted in the even-numbered
years of a biennium. However, the estimated revenues and caseloads for use in
the governor's budget document may be adjusted to reflect budgetary revenue
transfers and revenue and caseload estimates dependent upon budgetary
assumptions of enrollments, workloads, and caseloads. All adjustments to the
approved estimated revenues and caseloads must be set forth in the budget
document. The governor may additionally submit, as an appendix to each
supplemental, biennial, or six-year agency budget or to the budget document or
documents, a proposal for expenditures in the ensuing fiscal period from
revenue sources derived from proposed changes in existing statutes.

Supplemental and
biennial documents shall reflect a six-year expenditure plan consistent with
estimated revenues from existing sources and at existing rates for those
agencies required to submit six-year program and financial plans under RCW
44.40.070. Any additional revenue resulting from proposed changes to existing
statutes shall be separately identified within the document as well as related
expenditures for the six-year period.

The budget document or
documents shall also contain:

(a) Revenues classified
by fund and source for the immediately past fiscal period, those received or
anticipated for the current fiscal period, those anticipated for the ensuing
biennium, and those anticipated for the ensuing six-year period to support the
six-year programs and financial plans required under RCW 44.40.070;

(b) The undesignated
fund balance or deficit, by fund;

(c) Such additional
information dealing with expenditures, revenues, workload, performance, and
personnel as the legislature may direct by law or concurrent resolution;

(d) Such additional
information dealing with revenues and expenditures as the governor shall deem
pertinent and useful to the legislature;

(e) Tabulations showing
expenditures classified by fund, function, activity, and agency. However,
documents submitted for the 2003-05 biennial budget request need not show
expenditures by activity;

(f) A delineation of
each agency's activities, including those activities funded from nonbudgeted,
nonappropriated sources, including funds maintained outside the state treasury;

(g) Identification of
all proposed direct expenditures to implement the Puget Sound water quality
plan under chapter 90.71 RCW, shown by agency and in total; and

(h) Tabulations showing
each postretirement adjustment by retirement system established after fiscal
year 1991, to include, but not be limited to, estimated total payments made to
the end of the previous biennial period, estimated payments for the present
biennium, and estimated payments for the ensuing biennium.

(2) The budget document
or documents shall include detailed estimates of all anticipated revenues
applicable to proposed operating or capital expenditures and shall also include
all proposed operating or capital expenditures. The total of beginning
undesignated fund balance and estimated revenues less working capital and other
reserves shall equal or exceed the total of proposed applicable expenditures.
The budget document or documents shall further include:

(a) Interest,
amortization and redemption charges on the state debt;

(b) Payments of all
reliefs, judgments, and claims;

(c) Other statutory
expenditures;

(d) Expenditures
incident to the operation for each agency;

(e) Revenues derived
from agency operations;

(f) Expenditures and revenues
shall be given in comparative form showing those incurred or received for the
immediately past fiscal period and those anticipated for the current biennium
and next ensuing biennium, as well as those required to support the six-year
programs and financial plans required under RCW 44.40.070;

(g) A showing and
explanation of amounts of general fund and other funds obligations for debt
service and any transfers of moneys that otherwise would have been available
for appropriation;

(h) Common school expenditures
on a fiscal-year basis;

(i) A showing, by
agency, of the value and purpose of financing contracts for the lease/purchase
or acquisition of personal or real property for the current and ensuing fiscal
periods; and

(j) A showing and
explanation of anticipated amounts of general fund and other funds required to
amortize the unfunded actuarial accrued liability of the retirement system
specified under chapter 41.45 RCW, and the contributions to meet such
amortization, stated in total dollars and as a level percentage of total
compensation.

(3) A separate capital
budget document or schedule shall be submitted that will contain the following:

(a) A statement setting
forth a long-range facilities plan for the state that identifies and includes
the highest priority needs within affordable spending levels;

(b) A capital program
consisting of proposed capital projects for the next biennium and the two
biennia succeeding the next biennium consistent with the long-range facilities
plan. Insomuch as is practical, and recognizing emergent needs, the capital
program shall reflect the priorities, projects, and spending levels proposed in
previously submitted capital budget documents in order to provide a reliable
long-range planning tool for the legislature and state agencies;

(c) A capital plan
consisting of proposed capital spending for at least four biennia succeeding
the next biennium;

(d) A strategic plan
for reducing backlogs of maintenance and repair projects. The plan shall
include a prioritized list of specific facility deficiencies and capital
projects to address the deficiencies for each agency, cost estimates for each
project, a schedule for completing projects over a reasonable period of time,
and identification of normal maintenance activities to reduce future backlogs;

(e) A statement of the
reason or purpose for a project;

(f) Verification that a
project is consistent with the provisions set forth in chapter 36.70A RCW;

(g) A statement about
the proposed site, size, and estimated life of the project, if applicable;

(h) Estimated total
project cost;

(i) For major projects
valued over five million dollars, estimated costs for the following project
components: Acquisition, consultant services, construction, equipment, project
management, and other costs included as part of the project. Project component
costs shall be displayed in a standard format defined by the office of
financial management to allow comparisons between projects;

(j) Estimated total
project cost for each phase of the project as defined by the office of
financial management;

(k) Estimated ensuing
biennium costs;

(l) Estimated costs
beyond the ensuing biennium;

(m) Estimated
construction start and completion dates;

(n) Source and type of
funds proposed;

(o) Estimated ongoing
operating budget costs or savings resulting from the project, including
staffing and maintenance costs;

(p) For any capital
appropriation requested for a state agency for the acquisition of land or the
capital improvement of land in which the primary purpose of the acquisition or
improvement is recreation or wildlife habitat conservation, the capital budget
document, or an omnibus list of recreation and habitat acquisitions provided
with the governor's budget document, shall identify the projected costs of
operation and maintenance for at least the two biennia succeeding the next
biennium. Omnibus lists of habitat and recreation land acquisitions shall
include individual project cost estimates for operation and maintenance as well
as a total for all state projects included in the list. The document shall
identify the source of funds from which the operation and maintenance costs are
proposed to be funded;

(q) Such other
information bearing upon capital projects as the governor deems to be useful;

(r) Standard terms,
including a standard and uniform definition of normal maintenance, for all
capital projects;

(s) Such other
information as the legislature may direct by law or concurrent resolution.

For purposes of this
subsection (3), the term "capital project" shall be defined
subsequent to the analysis, findings, and recommendations of a joint committee
comprised of representatives from the house capital appropriations committee,
senate ways and means committee, legislative transportation committee,
legislative evaluation and accountability program committee, and office of
financial management.

(4) No
change affecting the comparability of agency or program information relating to
expenditures, revenues, workload, performance and personnel shall be made in
the format of any budget document or report presented to the legislature under
this section or RCW 43.88.160(1) relative to the format of the budget document
or report which was presented to the previous regular session of the
legislature during an odd-numbered year without prior legislative concurrence.
Prior legislative concurrence shall consist of (a) a favorable majority vote on
the proposal by the standing committees on ways and means of both houses if the
legislature is in session or (b) a favorable majority vote on the proposal by
members of the legislative evaluation and accountability program committee if
the legislature is not in session.

Sec. 911. RCW 43.320.110 and 2001
2nd sp.s. c 7 s 911 are each amended to read as follows:

There is created a
local fund known as the "financial services regulation fund" which
shall consist of all moneys received by the divisions of the department of
financial institutions, except for the division of securities which shall
deposit thirteen percent of all moneys received, and which shall be used for
the purchase of supplies and necessary equipment; the payment of salaries,
wages, and utilities; the establishment of reserves; and other incidental costs
required for the proper regulation of individuals and entities subject to
regulation by the department. The state treasurer shall be the custodian of
the fund. Disbursements from the fund shall be on authorization of the
director of financial institutions or the director's designee. In order to
maintain an effective expenditure and revenue control, the fund shall be
subject in all respects to chapter 43.88 RCW, but no appropriation is required
to permit expenditures and payment of obligations from the fund.

Between July 1, 2001,
and December 31, 2001, the legislature may transfer up to two million dollars
from the financial services regulation fund to the ((state general fund))
digital government revolving account. During the 2001-2003 fiscal biennium,
the legislature may transfer from the financial services regulation fund to the
state general fund such amounts as reflect the excess fund balance of the fund
and appropriations reductions made by the 2002 supplemental appropriations act
for administrative efficiencies and savings.

Sec. 912. RCW 48.02.190 and 1987 c
505 s 54 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) As used in this
section:

(a)
"Organization" means every insurer, as defined in RCW 48.01.050,
having a certificate of authority to do business in this state and every health
care service contractor registered to do business in this state. "Class
one" organizations shall consist of all insurers as defined in RCW
48.01.050. "Class two" organizations shall consist of all
organizations registered under provisions of chapter 48.44 RCW.

(b)
"Receipts" means (i) net direct premiums consisting of direct gross
premiums, as defined in RCW 48.18.170, paid for insurance written or renewed
upon risks or property resident, situated, or to be performed in this state,
less return premiums and premiums on policies not taken, dividends paid or
credited to policyholders on direct business, and premiums received from
policies or contracts issued in connection with qualified plans as defined in
RCW 48.14.021, and (ii) prepayments to health care service contractors as set
forth in RCW 48.44.010(3) less experience rating credits, dividends, prepayments
returned to subscribers, and payments for contracts not taken.

(2) The annual cost of
operating the office of insurance commissioner shall be determined by
legislative appropriation. A pro rata share of the cost shall be charged to
all organizations. Each class of organization shall contribute sufficient in
fees to the insurance commissioner's regulatory account to pay the reasonable
costs, including overhead, of regulating that class of organization.

(3) Fees charged shall
be calculated separately for each class of organization. The fee charged each
organization shall be that portion of the cost of operating the insurance
commissioner's office, for that class of organization, for the ensuing fiscal
year that is represented by the organization's portion of the receipts
collected or received by all organizations within that class on business in
this state during the previous calendar year: PROVIDED, That the fee shall not
exceed one-eighth of one percent of receipts: PROVIDED FURTHER, That the
minimum fee shall be one thousand dollars.

(4) The commissioner
shall annually, on or before June 1, calculate and bill each organization for
the amount of its fee. Fees shall be due and payable no later than June 15 of
each year: PROVIDED, That if the necessary financial records are not available
or if the amount of the legislative appropriation is not determined in time to
carry out such calculations and bill such fees within the time specified, the
commissioner may use the fee factors for the prior year as the basis for the
fees and, if necessary, the commissioner may impose supplemental fees to fully
and properly charge the organizations. The penalties for failure to pay fees
when due shall be the same as the penalties for failure to pay taxes pursuant
to RCW 48.14.060. The fees required by this section are in addition to all
other taxes and fees now imposed or that may be subsequently imposed.

(5) All moneys
collected shall be deposited in the insurance commissioner's regulatory account
in the state treasury which is hereby created.

(6) Unexpended funds in
the insurance commissioner's regulatory account at the close of a fiscal year
shall be carried forward in the insurance commissioner's regulatory account to
the succeeding fiscal year and shall be used to reduce future fees. During
the 2001-2003 fiscal biennium, the legislature may transfer from the insurance
commissioner's regulatory account to the state general fund such amounts as
reflect the appropriations reductions made by the 2002 supplemental
appropriations act for administrative efficiencies and savings.

Sec. 913. RCW 50.16.010 and 1993 c
483 s 7 and 1993 c 226 s 10 are each reenacted and amended to read as follows:

There shall be
maintained as special funds, separate and apart from all public moneys or funds
of this state an unemployment compensation fund, an administrative contingency
fund, and a federal interest payment fund, which shall be administered by the
commissioner exclusively for the purposes of this title, and to which RCW
43.01.050 shall not be applicable.

The unemployment
compensation fund shall consist of

(1) all contributions
and payments in lieu of contributions collected pursuant to the provisions of
this title,

(2) any property or securities
acquired through the use of moneys belonging to the fund,

(3) all earnings of
such property or securities,

(4) any moneys received
from the federal unemployment account in the unemployment trust fund in
accordance with Title XII of the social security act, as amended,

(5) all money recovered
on official bonds for losses sustained by the fund,

(6) all money credited
to this state's account in the unemployment trust fund pursuant to section 903
of the social security act, as amended,

(7) all money received
from the federal government as reimbursement pursuant to section 204 of the
federal-state extended compensation act of 1970 (84 Stat. 708‑712; 26
U.S.C. Sec. 3304), and

(8) all moneys received
for the fund from any other source.

All moneys in the
unemployment compensation fund shall be commingled and undivided.

The administrative
contingency fund shall consist of all interest on delinquent contributions
collected pursuant to this title, all fines and penalties collected pursuant to
the provisions of this title, all sums recovered on official bonds for losses
sustained by the fund, and revenue received under RCW 50.24.014: PROVIDED,
That all fees, fines, forfeitures and penalties collected or assessed by a
district court because of the violation of a state law shall be remitted as
provided in chapter 3.62 RCW as now exists or is later amended.

Moneys available in the
administrative contingency fund, other than money in the special account
created under RCW 50.24.014, shall be expended upon the direction of the
commissioner, with the approval of the governor, whenever it appears to him or
her that such expenditure is necessary for:

(a) The proper
administration of this title and no federal funds are available for the
specific purpose to which such expenditure is to be made, provided, the moneys
are not substituted for appropriations from federal funds which, in the absence
of such moneys, would be made available.

(b) The proper
administration of this title for which purpose appropriations from federal
funds have been requested but not yet received, provided, the administrative
contingency fund will be reimbursed upon receipt of the requested federal
appropriation.

(c) The proper
administration of this title for which compliance and audit issues have been
identified that establish federal claims requiring the expenditure of state
resources in resolution. Claims must be resolved in the following priority:
First priority is to provide services to eligible participants within the state;
second priority is to provide substitute services or program support; and last
priority is the direct payment of funds to the federal government.

(d) During the
2001-2003 fiscal biennium, the cost of worker retraining programs at community
and technical colleges as appropriated by the legislature.

Money in the special
account created under RCW 50.24.014 may only be expended, after appropriation,
for the purposes specified in RCW 50.62.010, 50.62.020, 50.62.030, 50.04.070,
50.04.072, 50.16.010, 50.29.025, 50.24.014, 50.44.053, and 50.22.010.

Sec. 914. RCW 50.20.190 and 2001 c
146 s 7 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) An individual who
is paid any amount as benefits under this title to which he or she is not
entitled shall, unless otherwise relieved pursuant to this section, be liable
for repayment of the amount overpaid. The department shall issue an
overpayment assessment setting forth the reasons for and the amount of the
overpayment. The amount assessed, to the extent not collected, may be deducted
from any future benefits payable to the individual: PROVIDED, That in the
absence of a back pay award, a settlement affecting the allowance of benefits,
fraud, misrepresentation, or willful nondisclosure, every determination of
liability shall be mailed or personally served not later than two years after
the close of or final payment made on the individual's applicable benefit year
for which the purported overpayment was made, whichever is later, unless the
merits of the claim are subjected to administrative or judicial review in which
event the period for serving the determination of liability shall be extended
to allow service of the determination of liability during the six-month period
following the final decision affecting the claim.

(2) The commissioner
may waive an overpayment if the commissioner finds that the overpayment was not
the result of fraud, misrepresentation, willful nondisclosure, or fault
attributable to the individual and that the recovery thereof would be against
equity and good conscience: PROVIDED, HOWEVER, That the overpayment so waived
shall be charged against the individual's applicable entitlement for the
eligibility period containing the weeks to which the overpayment was attributed
as though such benefits had been properly paid.

(3) Any assessment
herein provided shall constitute a determination of liability from which an
appeal may be had in the same manner and to the same extent as provided for
appeals relating to determinations in respect to claims for benefits:
PROVIDED, That an appeal from any determination covering overpayment only shall
be deemed to be an appeal from the determination which was the basis for
establishing the overpayment unless the merits involved in the issue set forth
in such determination have already been heard and passed upon by the appeal
tribunal. If no such appeal is taken to the appeal tribunal by the individual
within thirty days of the delivery of the notice of determination of liability,
or within thirty days of the mailing of the notice of determination, whichever
is the earlier, the determination of liability shall be deemed conclusive and
final. Whenever any such notice of determination of liability becomes
conclusive and final, the commissioner, upon giving at least twenty days notice
by certified mail return receipt requested to the individual's last known
address of the intended action, may file with the superior court clerk of any
county within the state a warrant in the amount of the notice of determination
of liability plus a filing fee under RCW 36.18.012(10). The clerk of the
county where the warrant is filed shall immediately designate a superior court
cause number for the warrant, and the clerk shall cause to be entered in the
judgment docket under the superior court cause number assigned to the warrant,
the name of the person(s) mentioned in the warrant, the amount of the notice of
determination of liability, and the date when the warrant was filed. The
amount of the warrant as docketed shall become a lien upon the title to, and
any interest in, all real and personal property of the person(s) against whom
the warrant is issued, the same as a judgment in a civil case duly docketed in
the office of such clerk. A warrant so docketed shall be sufficient to support
the issuance of writs of execution and writs of garnishment in favor of the
state in the manner provided by law for a civil judgment. A copy of the
warrant shall be mailed to the person(s) mentioned in the warrant by certified
mail to the person's last known address within five days of its filing with the
clerk.

(4) On request of any
agency which administers an employment security law of another state, the
United States, or a foreign government and which has found in accordance with
the provisions of such law that a claimant is liable to repay benefits received
under such law, the commissioner may collect the amount of such benefits from
the claimant to be refunded to the agency. In any case in which under this
section a claimant is liable to repay any amount to the agency of another
state, the United States, or a foreign government, such amounts may be
collected without interest by civil action in the name of the commissioner
acting as agent for such agency if the other state, the United States, or the
foreign government extends such collection rights to the employment security
department of the state of Washington, and provided that the court costs be
paid by the governmental agency benefiting from such collection.

(5) Any employer who is
a party to a back pay award or settlement due to loss of wages shall, within
thirty days of the award or settlement, report to the department the amount of
the award or settlement, the name and social security number of the recipient
of the award or settlement, and the period for which it is awarded. When an
individual has been awarded or receives back pay, for benefit purposes the
amount of the back pay shall constitute wages paid in the period for which it
was awarded. For contribution purposes, the back pay award or settlement shall
constitute wages paid in the period in which it was actually paid. The
following requirements shall also apply:

(a) The employer shall
reduce the amount of the back pay award or settlement by an amount determined
by the department based upon the amount of unemployment benefits received by
the recipient of the award or settlement during the period for which the back
pay award or settlement was awarded;

(b) The employer shall
pay to the unemployment compensation fund, in a manner specified by the
commissioner, an amount equal to the amount of such reduction;

(c) The employer shall
also pay to the department any taxes due for unemployment insurance purposes on
the entire amount of the back pay award or settlement notwithstanding any
reduction made pursuant to (a) of this subsection;

(d) If the employer
fails to reduce the amount of the back pay award or settlement as required in
(a) of this subsection, the department shall issue an overpayment assessment
against the recipient of the award or settlement in the amount that the back
pay award or settlement should have been reduced; and

(e) If the employer
fails to pay to the department an amount equal to the reduction as required in
(b) of this subsection, the department shall issue an assessment of liability
against the employer which shall be collected pursuant to the procedures for
collection of assessments provided herein and in RCW 50.24.110.

(6) When an individual
fails to repay an overpayment assessment that is due and fails to arrange for
satisfactory repayment terms, the commissioner shall impose an interest penalty
of one percent per month of the outstanding balance. Interest shall accrue
immediately on overpayments assessed pursuant to RCW 50.20.070 and shall be imposed
when the assessment becomes final. For any other overpayment, interest shall
accrue when the individual has missed two or more of their monthly payments
either partially or in full. The interest penalty shall be used to fund
detection and recovery of overpayment and collection activities, and worker
retraining programs at the community and technical colleges as appropriated by
the legislature.

Sec. 915. RCW 51.44.170 and 1997 c
327 s 1 are each amended to read as follows:

The industrial
insurance premium refund account is created in the custody of the state
treasurer. All industrial insurance refunds earned by state agencies or
institutions of higher education under the state fund retrospective rating
program shall be deposited into the account. The account is subject to the
allotment procedures under chapter 43.88 RCW, but no appropriation is required
for expenditures from the account. Only the executive head of the agency or
institution of higher education, or designee, may authorize expenditures from
the account. No agency or institution of higher education may make an
expenditure from the account for an amount greater than the refund earned by the
agency. If the agency or institution of higher education has staff dedicated
to workers' compensation claims management, expenditures from the account must
be used to pay for that staff, but additional expenditure from the account may
be used for any program within an agency or institution of higher education
that promotes or provides incentives for employee workplace safety and health
and early, appropriate return-to-work for injured employees. During the
2001-2003 fiscal biennium, the legislature may transfer from the industrial
insurance premium refund account to the state general fund such amounts as
reflect the reductions made by the 2002 supplemental appropriations act for
administrative efficiencies and savings.

Sec. 916. RCW 66.08.170 and 1961
ex.s. c 6 s 1 are each amended to read as follows:

There shall be a fund,
known as the "liquor revolving fund", which shall consist of all
license fees, permit fees, penalties, forfeitures, and all other moneys,
income, or revenue received by the board. The state treasurer shall be
custodian of the fund. All moneys received by the board or any employee
thereof, except for change funds and an amount of petty cash as fixed by the
board within the authority of law shall be deposited each day in a depository
approved by the state treasurer and transferred to the state treasurer to be
credited to the liquor revolving fund. During the 2001-2003 fiscal
biennium, the legislature may transfer from the liquor revolving account to the
state general fund such amounts as reflect the excess fund balance of the fund
and reductions made by the 2002 supplemental appropriations act for
administrative efficiencies and savings. Disbursements from the revolving
fund shall be on authorization of the board or a duly authorized representative
thereof. In order to maintain an effective expenditure and revenue control the
liquor revolving fund shall be subject in all respects to chapter 43.88 RCW but
no appropriation shall be required to permit expenditures and payment of
obligations from such fund.

Sec. 917. RCW 66.08.235 and 1997 c
75 s 1 are each amended to read as follows:

The liquor control
board construction and maintenance account is created within the state treasury.
The liquor control board shall deposit into this account a portion of the
board's markup, as authorized by chapter 66.16 RCW, placed upon liquor as
determined by the board. Moneys in the account may be spent only after
appropriation. The liquor control board shall use deposits to this account to
fund construction and maintenance of a centralized distribution center for
liquor products intended for sale through the board's liquor store and vendor
system. During the 2001-2003 fiscal biennium, the legislature may transfer
from the liquor control board construction and maintenance account to the state
general fund such amounts as reflect the excess fund balance of the account.

Sec. 918. RCW 67.70.260 and 1985 c
375 s 6 are each amended to read as follows:

There is hereby created
the lottery administrative account in the state treasury. The account shall be
managed, controlled, and maintained by the director. The legislature may
appropriate from the account for the payment of costs incurred in the operation
and administration of the lottery. During the 2001-2003 fiscal biennium,
the legislature may transfer from the lottery administrative account to the
state general fund such amounts as reflect the appropriations reductions made
by the 2002 supplemental appropriations act for administrative efficiencies and
savings.

Sec. 919. RCW 69.50.520 and 2001
2nd sp.s. c 7 s 920 and 2001 c 168 s 3 are each reenacted and amended to read
as follows:

The violence reduction
and drug enforcement account is created in the state treasury. All designated
receipts from RCW 9.41.110(8), 66.24.210(4), 66.24.290(2), 69.50.505(i)(1),
82.08.150(5), 82.24.020(2), 82.64.020, and section 420, chapter 271, Laws of 1989
shall be deposited into the account. Expenditures from the account may be used
only for funding services and programs under chapter 271, Laws of 1989 and
chapter 7, Laws of 1994 sp. sess., including state incarceration costs. Funds
from the account may also be appropriated to reimburse local governments for
costs associated with implementing criminal justice legislation including
chapter 338, Laws of 1997. During the 2001-2003 biennium, funds from the
account may also be used for costs associated with providing grants to local
governments in accordance with chapter 338, Laws of 1997, the replacement of
the department of corrections' offender-based tracking system, maintenance and
operating costs of the Washington association of sheriffs and police chiefs
jail reporting system, and for multijurisdictional narcotics task forces. ((After
July 1, 2003, at least seven and one-half percent of expenditures from the
account shall be used for providing grants to community networks under chapter
70.190 RCW by the family policy council.))

Sec. 920. RCW 70.146.030 and 2001
2nd sp.s. c 7 s 922 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) The water quality
account is hereby created in the state treasury. Moneys in the account may be
used only in a manner consistent with this chapter. Moneys deposited in the
account shall be administered by the department of ecology and shall be subject
to legislative appropriation. Moneys placed in the account shall include tax
receipts as provided in RCW 82.24.027, 82.26.025, and 82.32.390, principal and
interest from the repayment of any loans granted pursuant to this chapter, and
any other moneys appropriated to the account by the legislature.

(2) The department may
use or permit the use of any moneys in the account to make grants or loans to
public bodies, including grants to public bodies as cost-sharing moneys in any
case where federal, local, or other funds are made available on a cost-sharing
basis, for water pollution control facilities and activities, or for purposes
of assisting a public body to obtain an ownership interest in water pollution
control facilities and/or to defray a part of the payments made by a public
body to a service provider under a service agreement entered into pursuant to
RCW 70.150.060, within the purposes of this chapter and for related administrative
expenses. For the period July 1, 2001, to June 30, 2003, moneys in the account
may be used to process applications received by the department that seek to
make changes to or transfer existing water rights and for grants and
technical assistance to public bodies for watershed planning under chapter
90.82 RCW. No more than three percent of the moneys deposited in the
account may be used by the department to pay for the administration of the
grant and loan program authorized by this chapter.

(3) Beginning with the
biennium ending June 30, 1997, the department shall present a biennial progress
report on the use of moneys from the account to the chairs of the senate
committee on ways and means and the house of representatives committee on
appropriations. The first report is due June 30, 1996, and the report for each
succeeding biennium is due December 31 of the odd-numbered year. The report
shall consist of a list of each recipient, project description, and amount of
the grant, loan, or both.

(4) During the fiscal
biennium ending June 30, 1997, moneys in the account may be transferred by the
legislature to the water right permit processing account.

Sec. 921. RCW 80.01.080 and 2001 c
238 s 8 are each amended to read as follows:

((The transportation
revolving fund and the public utilities revolving fund are abolished as of
April 1, 1949, and as of such date)) There is created in the state
treasury a (("))public service revolving fund(("
to which shall be transferred all moneys which then remain on hand to the
credit of the transportation revolving fund and the public utilities revolving
fund, subject, however, to outstanding warrants and other obligations
chargeable to appropriations made from such funds. From and after April 1,
1949,)). Regulatory fees payable by all types of public service
companies shall be deposited to the credit of the public service revolving
fund. Except for expenses payable out of the pipeline safety account, all
expense of operation of the Washington utilities and transportation commission
shall be payable out of the public service revolving fund.

During the 2001-2003
fiscal biennium, the legislature may transfer from the public service revolving
fund to the state general fund such amounts as reflect the appropriations
reductions made by the 2002 supplemental appropriations act for administrative
efficiencies and savings.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
922. If any provision of this
act or its application to any person or circumstance is held invalid, the
remainder of the act or the application of the provision to other persons or
circumstances is not affected.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 923. This act is necessary for
the immediate preservation of the public peace, health, or safety, or support
of the state government and its existing public institutions, and takes effect
immediately.

(End
of part)

INDEX

ADMINISTRATOR FOR THE
COURTS.................................... 9

ATTORNEY
GENERAL............................................... 19

SALARY
ADJUSTMENTS............................................ 211

BOARD
FOR VOLUNTEER FIRE FIGHTERS.............................. 39

BOARD
OF INDUSTRIAL INSURANCE APPEALS.......................... 86

BOARD
OF TAX APPEALS........................................... 35

CASELOAD
FORECAST COUNCIL...................................... 20

CENTRAL
WASHINGTON UNIVERSITY................................. 189

CITIZENS'
COMMISSION ON SALARIES FOR ELECTED OFFICIALS......... 18

COMMISSION
ON AFRICAN-AMERICAN AFFAIRS......................... 31

COMMISSION
ON ASIAN-AMERICAN AFFAIRS........................... 17

COMMISSION
ON HISPANIC AFFAIRS................................. 31

COMMISSION
ON JUDICIAL CONDUCT.................................. 9

CONSERVATION
COMMISSION....................................... 112

CONTINGENCY
POOL.............................................. 225

COURT
OF APPEALS................................................ 8

CRIMINAL
JUSTICE TRAINING COMMISSION........................... 86

DEPARTMENT
OF AGRICULTURE..................................... 122

DEPARTMENT
OF COMMUNITY, TRADE, AND ECONOMIC DEVELOPMENT....... 20

COUNTY
ASSISTANCE............................................. 214

COUNTY
CORPORATION ASSISTANCE................................. 214

COUNTY
PUBLIC HEALTH ASSISTANCE............................... 223

MUNICIPAL
CORPORATION ASSISTANCE.............................. 216

DEPARTMENT
OF CORRECTIONS...................................... 94

DEPARTMENT
OF ECOLOGY......................................... 102

DEPARTMENT
OF FINANCIAL INSTITUTIONS........................... 20

DEPARTMENT
OF FISH AND WILDLIFE............................... 113

DEPARTMENT
OF GENERAL ADMINISTRATION........................... 35

DEPARTMENT
OF HEALTH........................................... 91

DEPARTMENT
OF INFORMATION SERVICES............................. 36

DEPARTMENT
OF LABOR AND INDUSTRIES............................. 88

DEPARTMENT
OF LICENSING....................................... 126

DEPARTMENT
OF NATURAL RESOURCES............................... 118

DEPARTMENT
OF PERSONNEL........................................ 30

DEPARTMENT
OF RETIREMENT SYSTEMS

CONTRIBUTIONS
TO RETIREMENT SYSTEMS........................... 208

OPERATIONS..................................................... 31

DEPARTMENT
OF REVENUE.......................................... 33

DEPARTMENT
OF SERVICES FOR THE BLIND........................... 99

DEPARTMENT
OF SOCIAL AND HEALTH SERVICES....................... 44

ADMINISTRATION
AND SUPPORTING SERVICES PROGRAM................. 82

AGING
AND ADULT SERVICES PROGRAM............................... 67

ALCOHOL
AND SUBSTANCE ABUSE PROGRAM............................ 75

CHILDREN
AND FAMILY SERVICES PROGRAM........................... 45

DEVELOPMENTAL
DISABILITIES PROGRAM............................. 62

ECONOMIC
SERVICES PROGRAM...................................... 72

JUVENILE
REHABILITATION PROGRAM................................ 49

MEDICAL
ASSISTANCE PROGRAM..................................... 77

MENTAL
HEALTH PROGRAM.......................................... 54

VOCATIONAL
REHABILITATION PROGRAM.............................. 82

DEPARTMENT
OF VETERANS AFFAIRS................................. 90

EASTERN
WASHINGTON STATE HISTORICAL SOCIETY................... 201

EASTERN
WASHINGTON UNIVERSITY................................. 189

ECONOMIC
AND REVENUE FORECAST COUNCIL.......................... 28

EFFICIENCY
SAVINGS............................................ 226

EMPLOYMENT
SECURITY DEPARTMENT................................ 100

GOVERNOR

COMPENSATION--INSURANCE
BENEFITS.............................. 206

GOVERNOR'S
OFFICE OF INDIAN AFFAIRS............................ 17

GROWTH
PLANNING HEARINGS BOARD................................. 43

HIGHER
EDUCATION COORDINATING BOARD

FINANCIAL
AID AND GRANT PROGRAMS.............................. 194

POLICY
COORDINATION AND ADMINISTRATION........................ 193

HOME
CARE QUALITY AUTHORITY................................... 101

HOUSE
OF REPRESENTATIVES........................................ 2

HUMAN
RIGHTS COMMISSION........................................ 86

INCENTIVE
SAVINGS

FY
2002....................................................... 213

FY
2003....................................................... 213

INDETERMINATE
SENTENCE REVIEW BOARD............................ 89

INSURANCE
COMMISSIONER......................................... 37

INTERAGENCY
COMMITTEE FOR OUTDOOR RECREATION.................. 110

JOINT
LEGISLATIVE AUDIT AND REVIEW COMMITTEE.................... 3

JOINT
LEGISLATIVE SYSTEMS COMMITTEE............................. 7

LAW
LIBRARY..................................................... 8

LEGISLATIVE
EVALUATION AND ACCOUNTABILITY PROGRAM COMMITTEE..... 6

LIABILITY
ACCOUNT............................................. 224

LIEUTENANT
GOVERNOR............................................ 14

LIQUOR
CONTROL BOARD........................................... 38

MADER
SETTLEMENT.............................................. 224

MILITARY
DEPARTMENT............................................ 40

OFFICE
OF ADMINISTRATIVE HEARINGS.............................. 30

OFFICE
OF FINANCIAL MANAGEMENT................................. 29

COMPENSATION
ACTIONS OF PERSONNEL RESOURCES BOARD............. 212

EDUCATION
TECHNOLOGY REVOLVING ACCOUNT........................ 211

EMERGENCY
FUND................................................ 205

EXTRAORDINARY
CRIMINAL JUSTICE COSTS.......................... 206

FIRE
CONTINGENCY POOL......................................... 205

PENSION
SAVINGS............................................... 209

OFFICE
OF PUBLIC DEFENSE....................................... 11

OFFICE
OF THE GOVERNOR......................................... 13

OFFICE
OF THE STATE ACTUARY..................................... 6

PERSONNEL
APPEALS BOARD........................................ 31

PUBLIC
DISCLOSURE COMMISSION................................... 14

PUBLIC
EMPLOYMENT RELATIONS COMMISSION......................... 43

REVOLVING
FUND REDUCTIONS..................................... 224

SALARY
COST OF LIVING ADJUSTMENT.............................. 210

SECRETARY
OF STATE............................................. 14

SENATE.......................................................... 2

SENTENCING
GUIDELINES COMMISSION............................... 99

SPOKANE
INTERCOLLEGIATE RESEARCH AND TECHNOLOGY INSTITUTE..... 200

STATE
AUDITOR.................................................. 17

STATE
BOARD FOR COMMUNITY AND TECHNICAL COLLEGES.............. 184

STATE
BOARD OF EDUCATION...................................... 176

STATE
GAMBLING COMMISSION...................................... 30

STATE
HEALTH CARE AUTHORITY.................................... 84

STATE
INVESTMENT BOARD......................................... 33

STATE
PARKS AND RECREATION COMMISSION......................... 109

STATE
PATROL.................................................. 127

STATE
SCHOOL FOR THE BLIND.................................... 201

STATE
SCHOOL FOR THE DEAF..................................... 201

STATE
TREASURER................................................ 17

BOND
RETIREMENT AND INTEREST............................. 203, 204

STATE
REVENUES FOR DISTRIBUTION............................... 227

TRANSFERS..................................................... 228

STATUTE
LAW COMMITTEE........................................... 7

SUNDRY
CLAIMS................................................. 225

SUPERINTENDENT
OF PUBLIC INSTRUCTION.......................... 130

BASIC
EDUCATION EMPLOYEE COMPENSATION......................... 145

EDUCATION
REFORM PROGRAMS..................................... 163

EDUCATIONAL
SERVICE DISTRICTS................................. 160

FOR
MISCELLANEOUS PURPOSES UNDER THE ELEMENTARY AND SECONDARY 163

GENERAL
APPORTIONMENT......................................... 137

INSTITUTIONAL
EDUCATION PROGRAMS.............................. 161

LEARNING
ASSISTANCE PROGRAM................................... 171

LOCAL
EFFORT ASSISTANCE....................................... 161

LOCAL
ENHANCEMENT FUNDS....................................... 174

PROGRAMS
FOR HIGHLY CAPABLE STUDENTS.......................... 162

PUPIL
TRANSPORTATION.......................................... 152

SCHOOL
EMPLOYEE COMPENSATION ADJUSTMENTS...................... 150

SPECIAL
EDUCATION PROGRAMS.................................... 153

STUDENT
ACHIEVEMENT PROGRAM................................... 175

TRAFFIC
SAFETY EDUCATION PROGRAMS............................. 159

TRANSITIONAL
BILINGUAL PROGRAMS............................... 170

SUPREME
COURT................................................... 7

THE
EVERGREEN STATE COLLEGE................................... 190

UNIVERSITY
OF WASHINGTON...................................... 186

UTILITIES
AND TRANSPORTATION COMMISSION........................ 38

WASHINGTON
STATE ARTS COMMISSION.............................. 200

WASHINGTON
STATE HISTORICAL SOCIETY........................... 201

WASHINGTON
STATE LIBRARY...................................... 200

WASHINGTON
STATE LOTTERY....................................... 30

WASHINGTON
STATE UNIVERSITY................................... 188

WESTERN
WASHINGTON UNIVERSITY................................. 193

WORK
FORCE TRAINING AND EDUCATION COORDINATING BOARD.......... 199

---
END ---