BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF
WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec.
1. The legislature finds
that the summer chum salmon (Onchorynchus keta) evolutionarily
significant unit of Hood Canal within the Puget Sound chinook salmon (Onchorynchus
tshawytscha) evolutionarily significant unit is in danger of extinction,
and that other stocks of salmon and steelhead in Hood Canal have been
drastically reduced. The legislature also finds that other species of fish,
including ling cod, black cod, perch, and smelt, have been greatly depleted in
the waters of Hood Canal. The legislature recognizes that volunteers have
restored miles of spawning and rearing habitat for these fish, but this
pristine habitat is largely unused because of insufficient numbers of fish
returning to spawn. The legislature finds that a temporary closing of this
body of water to fishing would help restore the natural balance of all these
species.

Sec. 2. RCW 77.85.010 and 2000 c
107 s 92 are each amended to read as follows:

The definitions in this
section apply throughout this chapter unless the context clearly requires
otherwise.

(1) "Adaptive
management" means reliance on scientific methods to test the results of
actions taken so that the management and related policy can be changed promptly
and appropriately.

(2) "Critical
pathways methodology" means a project scheduling and management process
for examining interactions between habitat projects and salmonid species,
prioritizing habitat projects, and assuring positive benefits from habitat
projects.

(3) "Habitat
project list" is the list of projects resulting from the critical pathways
methodology under RCW 77.85.060(2). Each project on the list must have a
written agreement from the landowner on whose land the project will be
implemented. Projects include habitat restoration projects, habitat protection
projects, habitat projects that improve water quality, habitat projects that
protect water quality, habitat-related mitigation projects, and habitat project
maintenance and monitoring activities.

(4) "Habitat work
schedule" means those projects from the habitat project list that will be
implemented during the current funding cycle. The schedule shall also include
a list of the entities and individuals implementing projects, the start date,
duration, estimated date of completion, estimated cost, and funding sources for
the projects.

(5) "Hood Canal
coordinating council" means the council of governments created within Kitsap,
Jefferson, and Mason counties as provided under chapter 39.34 RCW.

(6)
"Limiting factors" means conditions that limit the ability of habitat
to fully sustain populations of salmon. These factors are primarily fish
passage barriers and degraded estuarine areas, riparian corridors, stream
channels, and wetlands.

(((6))) (7)
"Project sponsor" is a county, city, special district, tribal
government, a combination of such governments through interlocal agreements
provided under chapter 39.34 RCW, a nonprofit organization, or one or more
private citizens.

(((7))) (8)
"Salmon" includes all species of the family Salmonidae which are
capable of self-sustaining, natural production.

(((8))) (9)
"Salmon recovery plan" means a state plan developed in response to a
proposed or actual listing under the federal endangered species act that
addresses limiting factors including, but not limited to harvest, hatchery,
hydropower, habitat, and other factors of decline.

(((9))) (10)
"Tribe" or "tribes" means federally recognized Indian
tribes.

(((10))) (11)
"WRIA" means a water resource inventory area established in chapter
173-500 WAC as it existed on January 1, 1997.

(((11))) (12)
"Owner" means the person holding title to the land or the person
under contract with the owner to lease or manage the legal owner's property.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
3. A new section is added
to chapter 77.85 RCW to read as follows:

(1) The Hood Canal
marine sanctuary is created within the geographic area covered by the Hood
Canal summer chum salmon evolutionarily significant unit. The sanctuary is
bounded by northwest corner of Kitsap county and runs due west to the shoreline
of Jefferson county and claims all waters south of that boundary. The
sanctuary is designed to protect, preserve, and fully recover in the following
order:

(a) Summer chum salmon,
chinook salmon, coho salmon, and steelhead;

(b) Herring, smelt,
ling cod, perch, and black cod; and

(c) All other species
of aquatic animal and plant life indigenous to Hood Canal, except shellfish.

(2) The fish and
wildlife commission, in coordination with the tribal comanagers, must prohibit
any harvest of summer chum, fall chinook, or coho salmon, or of steelhead, in
Hood Canal and its tributaries until such time as the runs have fully recovered
and can sustain such a harvest without impairing future production. Nothing in
this section is intended to impair any tribal treaty fishing right. Tribes are
encouraged to limit the harvest of these fish until they are fully recovered.

(3) By July 1, 2004,
the department of fish and wildlife, in coordination with the tribal
comanagers, must develop a definition of full recovery as it is applied to
summer chum, chinook, and coho salmon and steelhead. This definition must be
based on the most recently available scientific data and be based primarily on
a field inventory count of escapement in all spawning tributaries. By October
1, 2002, the department must provide a complete inventory of all streams in the
geographic area covered by the summer chum salmon evolutionarily significant
unit. The effort to define full recovery and to identify all of the streams
must include the participation of the Hood Canal coordinating council and of
the Hood Canal salmon enhancement group.

(4) The department of
fish and wildlife must authorize the use of remote site incubators to enhance
summer chum salmon production. The department, in coordination with the Hood
Canal salmon enhancement group, must:

(a) Identify sites on
tributaries of Hood Canal that would be suitable for the placement of remote
site incubators; and

(b) Place the
incubators in suitable locations and manage the incubators as necessary.

(5) The department, in
coordination with the Hood Canal coordination council and volunteer groups,
must direct efforts toward ensuring that suitable habitat in the watersheds
covered by the summer chum evolutionarily significant unit is used by summer
chum salmon.

(6) The Hood Canal
coordinating council must report to the salmon recovery office as provided in
RCW 77.85.030 on the status of summer chum runs after the harvest prohibition
has been in place for two generations of summer chum salmon. The first report
on summer chum returns must be provided no later than December 31, 2007, and
the second report must be provided no later than December 31, 2011. At such
time as it is determined that all species of salmon and steelhead have reached
full recovery, the department of fish and wildlife must submit a report to the
legislature with a recommendation to change the designation of sanctuary to a
designation that would allow controlled harvest.

(7) The department of
fish and wildlife is authorized to extend the same protection to those waters
outside of the marine sanctuary as defined in subsection (1) of this section
that enter into Hood Canal as to Hood Canal or its tributaries.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 4. This act is necessary for
the immediate preservation of the public peace, health, or safety, or support
of the state government and its existing public institutions, and takes effect
immediately.

---
END ---