BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF
WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec.
1. The following acts or
parts of acts are each repealed:

(1) RCW 43.131.381 (Linked deposit
program--Termination) and 2001 c 316 s 1, 1994 c 126 s 2, & 1993 c 512 s
35; and

(2) RCW 43.131.382 (Linked deposit
program--Repeal) and 2001 c 316 s 2, 1994 c 126 s 3, & 1993 c 512 s 36.

---
END ---