BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF
WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec.
1. A new section is added
to chapter 49.44 RCW to read as follows:

(1) The definitions in
this subsection apply throughout this section unless the context clearly
requires otherwise.

(a)
"Employee" means an employee of a broadcasting industry employer
other than a sales or management employee.

(b) "Broadcasting
industry" means television, radio, cable stations and networks, and other
electronic platforms designed to distribute electronic signals normally containing
news, entertainment, and/or informational programming.

(c)
"Noncompetition" means a covenant not to compete, restrictive
covenant, or any agreement in which the applicant, employee, or independent
contractor agrees for a specific period of time within a specific geographic
area to refrain from employment that competes with the broadcasting industry
employer.

(2) Unless permitted in
this subsection, no broadcasting industry employer shall require any applicant,
employee, or independent contractor to enter a noncompetition agreement. This
subsection does not prevent the enforcement of a noncompetition clause during
the term of an employment contract in existence on the effective date of this
act or against an employee who breaches an employment contract.

(3) Any person or
entity violating subsection (2) of this section is liable for civil damages and
reasonable attorneys' fees and costs.

(4) Nothing in this
section restricts the right of an employer to protect trade secrets or other
proprietary information by lawful means in equity or under applicable law.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 2. This act is necessary for
the immediate preservation of the public peace, health, or safety, or support
of the state government and its existing public institutions, and takes effect
immediately.

---
END ---