BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF
WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1. RCW 18.106.010 and 2001
c 281 s 1 are each amended to read as follows:

Unless a different
meaning is plainly required by the context, the following words and phrases as
hereinafter used in this chapter shall have the following meaning:

(1) "Advisory
board" means the state advisory board of plumbers;

(2) "Contractor"
means any person, corporate or otherwise, who engages in, or offers or
advertises to engage in, any work covered by the provisions of this chapter by
way of trade or business, or any person, corporate or otherwise, who employs
anyone, or offers or advertises to employ anyone, to engage in any work covered
by the provisions of this chapter;

(3)
"Department" means the department of labor and industries;

(((3))) (4)
"Director" means the director of department of labor and industries;

(((4))) (5)
"Journeyman plumber" means any person who has been issued a
certificate of competency by the department of labor and industries as provided
in this chapter;

(((5))) (6)
"Medical gas piping" means oxygen, nitrous oxide, high pressure
nitrogen, medical compressed air, and medical vacuum systems;

(((6))) (7)
"Medical gas piping installer" means a journeyman plumber who has
been issued a medical gas piping installer endorsement;

(((7))) (8)
"Plumbing" means that craft involved in installing, altering, repairing
and renovating potable water systems, liquid waste systems, and medical gas
piping systems within a building. Installation in a water system of water
softening or water treatment equipment is not within the meaning of plumbing as
used in this chapter;

(((8))) (9)
"Specialty plumber" means anyone who has been issued a specialty
certificate of competency limited to:

(a) Installation,
maintenance, and repair of the plumbing of single-family dwellings, duplexes,
and apartment buildings that do not exceed three stories; or

(b) Maintenance and
repair of backflow prevention assemblies.

Sec. 2. RCW 18.106.020 and 1997
c 326 s 3 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) No person may
engage in or offer to engage in the trade of plumbing without having a
journeyman certificate, specialty certificate, temporary permit, or trainee
certificate. A trainee must be supervised by a person who has a journeyman
certificate, specialty certificate, or temporary permit, as specified in RCW 18.106.070.
No contractor may employ a person to engage in or offer to engage in the trade
of plumbing unless the person employed has a journeyman certificate, specialty
certificate, temporary permit, or trainee certificate. ((For the purposes
of this section, "contractor" means any person or body of persons,
corporate or otherwise, engaged in any work covered by the provisions of this
chapter, chapter 18.27 RCW, or chapter 19.28 RCW, by way of trade or business.
However, in no case shall)) This section does not apply to a
contractor who is contracting for work on his or her own residence.

(2) No person may
engage in or offer to engage in medical gas piping installation without having
a certificate of competency as a journeyman plumber and a medical gas piping
installer endorsement. A trainee may engage in medical gas piping installation
if he or she has a training certificate and is supervised by a person with a
medical gas piping installer endorsement. No contractor may employ a person to
engage in or offer to engage in medical gas piping installation unless the
person employed has a certificate of competency as a journeyman plumber and a
medical gas piping installer endorsement.

(3) No contractor
may advertise, offer to do work, submit a bid, or perform any work under this
chapter without being registered as a contractor under chapter 18.27 RCW.

(4) Violation of
((subsection (1) or (2) of)) this section is an infraction. Each day in
which a person engages in the trade of plumbing in violation of ((subsection
(1) or (2) of)) this section or employs a person in violation of ((subsection
(1) or (2) of)) this section is a separate infraction. Each worksite at
which a person engages in the trade of plumbing in violation of ((subsection
(1) or (2) of)) this section or at which a person is employed in violation
of ((subsection (1) or (2) of)) this section is a separate infraction.

(((4))) (5)
Notices of infractions for violations of ((subsection (1) or (2) of))
this section may be issued to:

(a) The person engaging
in or offering to engage in the trade of plumbing in violation of ((subsection
(1) or (2) of)) this section;

(b) The contractor in
violation of ((subsection (1) or (2) of)) this section; and

(c) The contractor's
employee who authorized the work assignment of the person employed in violation
of ((subsection (1) or (2) of)) this section.

Sec. 3. RCW 18.106.180 and 2000
c 171 s 27 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) An
authorized representative of the department may issue a notice of infraction as
specified in RCW 18.106.020(((4))) if:

(a) A person who
is doing plumbing work or who is offering to do plumbing work fails to produce
evidence of:

(i) Having a
certificate or permit issued by the department in accordance with this chapter,
or ((of)) being supervised by a person who has such a certificate or
permit; and

(ii) Being
registered as a contractor as required under chapter 18.27 RCW or this chapter,
or being employed by a person who is registered as a contractor;

(b) A person who
employs anyone, or offers or advertises to employ anyone, to do plumbing work
fails to produce evidence of being registered as a contractor as required under
chapter 18.27 RCW or this chapter; or

(c) A contractor
violates section 5 of this act.

(2) A notice of
infraction issued under this section shall be personally served on the person
named in the notice by an authorized representative of the department or sent
by certified mail to the last known address provided to the department of the
person named in the notice.

Sec. 4. RCW 18.106.250 and 2000
c 171 s 28 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) The administrative
law judge shall conduct notice of infraction cases under this chapter pursuant
to chapter 34.05 RCW.

(2) The burden of proof
is on the department to establish the commission of the infraction by a
preponderance of the evidence. The notice of infraction shall be dismissed if
the defendant establishes that, at the time the notice was issued:

(a) The defendant who
was issued a notice of infraction authorized by RCW 18.106.020(((4))) (5)(a)
had a certificate or permit issued by the department in accordance with this
chapter, was supervised by a person who has such a certificate or permit, or
was exempt from this chapter under RCW 18.106.150; or

(b) For the defendant
who was issued a notice of infraction authorized by RCW 18.106.020(((4)))
(5) (b) or (c), the person employed or supervised by the defendant has a
certificate or permit issued by the department in accordance with this chapter,
was supervised by a person who had such a certificate or permit, ((or))
was exempt from this chapter under RCW 18.106.150, or was registered as a
contractor under chapter 18.27 RCW.

(3) After consideration
of the evidence and argument, the administrative law judge shall determine
whether the infraction was committed. If it has not been established that the
infraction was committed, an order dismissing the notice shall be entered in
the record of the proceedings. If it has been established that the infraction
was committed, the administrative law judge shall issue findings of fact and
conclusions of law in its decision and order determining whether the infraction
was committed.

(4) An appeal from the
administrative law judge's determination or order shall be to the superior
court. The decision of the superior court is subject only to discretionary
review pursuant to Rule 2.3 of the Rules of Appellate Procedure.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
5. A new section is added
to chapter 18.106 RCW to read as follows:

(1) Contractors shall
accurately verify and attest to the trainee hours worked by plumbing trainees
on behalf of the contractor and that all training hours were under the
supervision of a certified plumber and within the proper ratio, and shall
provide the supervising plumbers' names and certificate numbers. However,
contractors are not required to identify which hours a trainee works with a
specific certified plumber.

(2) The department may
audit the records of a contractor that has verified the hours of experience
submitted by a plumbing trainee to the department under RCW 18.106.030 in the
following circumstances: Excessive hours were reported; hours were reported
outside the normal course of the contractor's business; or for other similar
circumstances in which the department demonstrates a likelihood of excessive or
improper hours being reported. The department shall limit the audit to records
necessary to verify hours. The department shall adopt rules implementing audit
procedures. Information obtained from a contractor under the provisions of
this section is confidential and is not open to public inspection under chapter
42.17 RCW.

(3) Violation of this
section by a contractor is an infraction.

Sec. 6. RCW 18.27.200 and 1997 c
314 s 14 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) It is a violation
of this chapter and an infraction for any contractor to:

(a) Advertise, offer to
do work, submit a bid, or perform any work as a contractor without being
registered as required by this chapter;

(b) Advertise, offer to
do work, submit a bid, or perform any work as a contractor when the
contractor's registration is suspended or revoked; ((or))

(c) Transfer a valid
registration to an unregistered contractor or allow an unregistered contractor
to work under a registration issued to another contractor; or

(d) If the contractor
is a contractor as defined in RCW 18.106.010, violate section 5 of this act.

(2) Each
day that a contractor works without being registered as required by this
chapter, works while the contractor's registration is suspended or revoked, or
works under a registration issued to another contractor is a separate
infraction. Each worksite at which a contractor works without being registered
as required by this chapter, works while the contractor's registration is
suspended or revoked, or works under a registration issued to another
contractor is a separate infraction.

---
END ---