BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF
WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1. RCW 3.34.020 and 1997 c
41 s 3 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) Any change in the
number of full and part-time district judges after January 1, 1992, shall be
determined by the legislature after receiving a recommendation from the supreme
court. The supreme court shall make its recommendations to the legislature
based on ((a weighted caseload)) an objective workload analysis
that takes into account ((the following:

(a) The extent of
time that existing judges have available to hear cases in that court;

(b) A measurement of
the judicial time needed to process various types of cases;

(c) A determination
of the time required to process each type of case to the individual court
workload;

(d) A determination
of the amount of a judge's annual work time that can be devoted exclusively to
processing cases; and

(e) An assessment of
judicial resource needs, including annual case filings, and case weights and
the judge year value determined under the weighted caseload method)) available judicial resources and the
caseload activity of each court.

(2) The administrator
for the courts, under the supervision of the supreme court, may consult with
the board of judicial administration and the district and municipal court
judge's association in developing the procedures and methods of applying the ((weighted
caseload)) objective workload analysis.

(3) For each
recommended change from the number of full and part-time district judges in any
county as of January 1, 1992, the administrator for the courts, under the
supervision of the supreme court, shall complete a judicial impact note
detailing any local or state cost associated with such recommended change.

(4) If the legislature
approves an increase in the base number of district judges in any county as of
January 1, 1992, such increase in the base number of district judges and all
related costs may be paid for by the county from moneys provided under RCW
82.14.310, and any such costs shall be deemed to be expended for criminal
justice purposes as provided in RCW 82.14.315, and such expenses shall not
constitute a supplanting of existing funding.

(5)(a) A county
legislative authority that desires to change the number of full or part-time
district judges from the base number on January 1, 1992, must first request the
assistance of the supreme court. The administrator for the courts, under the
supervision of the supreme court, shall conduct ((a weighted caseload)) an
objective workload analysis and make a recommendation of its findings to
the legislature for consideration as provided in this section.

(b) The
legislative authority of any county may change a part-time district judge
position to a full-time position.

--- END ---