BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF
WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1. RCW 72.40.010 and 1985 c
378 s 11 are each amended to read as follows:

There are established
at Vancouver, Clark county, a school which shall be known as the state school
for the blind, and a separate school which shall be known as the state school
for the deaf. The primary purpose of the state school for the blind and the
state school for the deaf is to educate and train hearing and visually impaired
children.

The ((schools)) school
for the blind shall be under the direction of ((their respective
superintendents)) the superintendent with the advice of the board of
trustees. The school for the deaf shall be under the direction of the
superintendent and the board of trustees.

Sec. 2. RCW 72.40.022 and 1993 c
147 s 1 are each amended to read as follows:

In addition to any
other powers and duties prescribed by law, the superintendent of the state
school for the blind ((and the superintendent of the state school for the
deaf)):

(1) Shall have full
control of ((their respective schools)) the school and the
property of various kinds.

(2) May establish
criteria, in addition to state certification, for teachers at ((their respective
schools)) the school.

(3) Shall employ
members of the faculty, administrative officers, and other employees, who shall
all be subject to chapter 41.06 RCW, the state civil service law, unless
specifically exempted by other provisions of law.

(4) Shall establish the
course of study including vocational training, with the assistance of the
faculty and the advice of the ((respective boards)) board of
trustees.

(5) May establish new
facilities as needs demand.

(6) May adopt rules,
under chapter 34.05 RCW, as deemed necessary for the government, management,
and operation of the housing facilities.

(7) Shall control the
use of the facilities and authorize the use of the facilities for night school,
summer school, public meetings, or other purposes consistent with the purposes
of ((their respective schools)) the school.

(8) May adopt rules for
pedestrian and vehicular traffic on property owned, operated, and maintained by
the ((respective schools)) school.

(9) Shall purchase
all supplies and lease or purchase equipment and other personal property needed
for the operation or maintenance of ((their respective schools)) the
school.

(10) Except as
otherwise provided by law, may enter into contracts as ((each)) the
superintendent deems essential to the ((respective purposes of their schools))
purpose of the school.

(11) May receive gifts,
grants, conveyances, devises, and bequests of real or personal property from
whatever source, as may be made from time to time, in trust or otherwise,
whenever the terms and conditions will aid in carrying out the programs of the
((respective schools)) school; sell, lease or exchange, invest,
or expend the same or the proceeds, rents, profits, and income thereof except
as limited by the terms and conditions thereof; and adopt rules to govern the
receipt and expenditure of the proceeds, rents, profits, and income thereof.

(12) May, except as
otherwise provided by law, enter into contracts ((as the superintendents
deem)) the superintendent deems essential for the operation of ((their
respective schools)) the school.

(13) May adopt rules
providing for the transferability of employees between the school for the deaf
and the school for the blind consistent with collective bargaining agreements
in effect.

(14) Shall prepare and
administer ((their respective budgets)) the school's budget
consistent with RCW 43.88.160 and the budget and accounting act, chapter 43.88
RCW generally, as applicable.

(15) May adopt rules
under chapter 34.05 RCW and perform all other acts not forbidden by law as the
superintendent((s)) deems necessary or appropriate to the
administration of ((their respective schools)) the school.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
3. A new section is added
to chapter 72.40 RCW to read as follows:

In addition to any
other powers and duties prescribed by law, the superintendent of the state
school for the deaf:

(1) Shall have the
responsibility for the supervision and management of the school and the
property of various kinds.

(2) May establish
criteria, in addition to state certification, for the teachers at the school.

(3) Shall employ
members of the faculty, administrative officers, and other employees, who shall
all be subject to chapter 41.06 RCW, the state civil service law, unless
specifically exempted by other provisions of law.

(4) Shall establish the
course of study including vocational training, with the assistance of the
faculty and the approval of the board of trustees.

(5) May establish, with
the approval of the board of trustees, new facilities as needs demand.

(6) May adopt rules,
under chapter 34.05 RCW, as approved by the board of trustees, as deemed
necessary for the governance, management, and operation of the housing
facilities.

(7) Shall, as approved
by the board of trustees, control the use of the facilities and authorize the
use of the facilities for night school, summer school, public meetings, or
other purposes consistent with the purposes of the school.

(8) May adopt rules, as
approved by the board of trustees, for pedestrian and vehicular traffic on
property owned, operated, and maintained by the school.

(9) Shall purchase all
supplies and lease or purchase equipment and other personal property needed for
the operation or maintenance of the school.

(10) Except as
otherwise provided by law, may enter into contracts as the superintendent deems
essential to the purpose of the school.

(11) May receive gifts,
grants, conveyances, devises, and bequests of real or personal property from
whatever source, as may be made from time to time, in trust or otherwise,
whenever the terms and conditions will aid in carrying out the programs of the
school; sell, lease or exchange, invest, or expend the same or the proceeds,
rents, profits, and income thereof except as limited by the terms and
conditions thereof; and adopt rules to govern the receipt and expenditure of
the proceeds, rents, profits, and income thereof.

(12) May adopt rules,
as approved by the board of trustees, providing for the transferability of
employees between the school for the deaf and the school for the blind
consistent with collective bargaining agreements in effect.

(13) Shall prepare,
submit to the board of trustees for approval, and administer the budget
consistent with RCW 43.88.160 and the budget and accounting act, chapter 43.88
RCW generally, as applicable.

(14) May adopt rules
under chapter 34.05 RCW, as approved by the board of trustees, and perform all
other acts not forbidden by law as the superintendent deems necessary or
appropriate to the administration of the school.

Sec. 4. RCW 72.40.024 and 1993 c
147 s 2 are each amended to read as follows:

In addition to the
powers and duties under RCW 72.40.022 and section 3 of this act, the
superintendent of each school shall:

(1) Monitor the
location and educational placement of each student reported to the
superintendents by the educational service district superintendents;

(2) Provide information
about educational programs, instructional techniques, materials, equipment, and
resources available to students with visual or auditory impairments to the
parent or guardian, educational service district superintendent, and the
superintendent of the school district where the student resides; and

(3) Serve as a
consultant to the office of the superintendent of public instruction, provide
instructional leadership, and assist school districts in improving their
instructional programs for students with visual or hearing impairments.

Sec. 5. RCW 72.42.010 and 1985 c
378 s 31 are each amended to read as follows:

It is the intention of
the legislature, in creating a board of trustees for the state school for the
deaf to perform the duties set forth in this chapter, that the board of
trustees perform needed ((advisory)) oversight services to the governor
and the legislature ((and to the superintendent)) of the Washington
state school for the deaf in the development of programs for the hearing
impaired, and in the operation of the Washington state school for the deaf.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
6. A new section is added
to chapter 72.42 RCW to read as follows:

Unless the context
clearly requires otherwise, as used in this chapter "school" means
the Washington state school for the deaf.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
7. A new section is added
to chapter 72.42 RCW to read as follows:

(1) The governance of
the school shall be vested in a board of trustees. The board shall consist of
nine members appointed by the governor, with the consent of the senate. The
board shall be composed of a resident from each of the state's congressional
districts and shall include:

(a) One member who is
deaf or hearing impaired;

(b) Two members who are
experienced educational professionals;

(c) One member who is
experienced in providing residential services to youth; and

(d) One member who is
the parent of a child who is deaf or hearing impaired and is receiving or has
received educational services related to deafness or hearing impairment from a
public educational institution.

(2) No voting trustee
may be an employee of the school, a member of the board of directors of any
school district, a member of the governing board of any public or private
educational institution, a school district or educational service district
administrator appointed after July 1, 1986, or an elected officer or member of
the legislative authority of any municipal corporation.

(3) Trustees shall be
appointed by the governor to serve a term of five years except that any person
appointed to fill a vacancy occurring prior to the expiration of any term shall
be appointed within sixty days of the vacancy and appointed only for the
remainder of the term. Of the initial members, three must be appointed for
two-year terms, three must be appointed for three-year terms, and the remainder
must be appointed for five-year terms.

(4) The board shall not
be deemed unlawfully constituted and a trustee shall not be deemed ineligible
to serve the remainder of the trustee's unexpired term on the board solely by
reason of the establishment of new or revised boundaries for congressional
districts. In such an event, each trustee may continue to serve in office for
the balance of the term for which he or she was appointed so long as the
trustee continues to reside within the boundaries of the congressional district
as they existed at the time of his or her appointment. Vacancies which occur
in a trustee position during the balance of any term shall be filled pursuant
to subsection (3) of this section by a successor who resides within the
boundaries of the congressional district from which the member whose office was
vacated was appointed as they existed at the time of his or her appointment.
At the completion of such term, and thereafter, a successor shall be appointed
from the congressional district which corresponds in number with the
congressional district from which the incumbent was appointed.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
8. A new section is added
to chapter 72.42 RCW to read as follows:

The board of trustees
of the school shall have the following powers and duties:

(1) Shall adopt rules
and regulations for its own governance;

(2) Shall direct the
development of, approve, and monitor the enforcement of policies, rules, and
regulations pertaining to the school, including but not limited to:

(a) The use of
classrooms and other facilities for summer or night schools or for public
meetings and any other uses;

(b) Pedestrian and
vehicular traffic on property owned, operated, or maintained by the school;

(c) Governance,
management, and operation of the residential facilities; and

(d) Transferability of
employees between the school for the deaf and the school for the blind
consistent with collective bargaining agreements in effect;

(3) Shall develop a
process for recommending candidates for the position of superintendent; upon a
vacancy shall submit a list of three qualified candidates for superintendent to
the governor; and shall advise the superintendent about the criteria and policy
to be used in the selection of members of the faculty, other administrative
officers, and other employees, who all, with the exception of the
superintendent, are subject to chapter 41.06 RCW, the state civil service law,
unless specifically exempted by other provisions of law;

(4) Shall submit an
evaluation of the superintendent to the governor by July 1st of each year that
includes a recommendation regarding the retention of the superintendent;

(5) May recommend to
the governor at any time that the superintendent be removed for misfeasance,
malfeasance, or willful neglect of duty;

(6) Shall prepare and
submit by July 1st of each even-numbered year a report to the governor and the
appropriate committees of the legislature which contains a detailed summary of
the school's progress on performance objectives and the school's work, facility
conditions, and revenues and costs of the school for the previous year and
which contains those recommendations it deems necessary and advisable for the
governor and the legislature to act on;

(7) Shall approve the
school's budget and all funding requests, both operating and capital, submitted
to the governor;

(8) Shall direct and
approve the development and implementation of comprehensive programs of
education, training, and as needed residential living, such that students
served by the school receive a challenging and quality education in a safe
school environment;

(9) Shall monitor and
inspect all existing facilities of the school and report its findings in its
annual report to the governor and appropriate committees of the legislature;
and

(10) May grant to every
student, upon graduation or completion of a program or course of study, a
suitable diploma, nonbaccalaureate degree, or certificate.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
9. A new section is added
to chapter 72.42 RCW to read as follows:

(1) The board of
trustees shall organize, adopt bylaws for its own governance, and adopt rules
not inconsistent with this chapter as they deem necessary. At such
organizational meeting it shall elect from among its members a chairman and a
vice-chairman, each to serve for one year, and annually thereafter shall elect
such officers to serve until their successors are appointed or qualified.

(2) A majority of the
voting members of the board in office constitutes a quorum, but a lesser number
may adjourn from time to time and may compel the attendance of absent members
in such manner as prescribed by its bylaws, rules, or regulations.

Sec. 10. RCW 72.42.070 and 1993 c
147 s 10 are each amended to read as follows:

The board of trustees
shall meet at least quarterly but may meet more frequently at such times as
the board by resolution determines or the bylaws of the board prescribe.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
11. The following acts or
parts of acts are each repealed:

(1) RCW 72.42.020 (Board of
trustees--Membership--Terms--Vacancies‑-Officers--Rules and regulations)
and 1993 c 147 s 9, 1985 c 378 s 33, 1982 1st ex.s. c 30 s 15, & 1972 ex.s.
c 96 s 2;

(2) RCW 72.42.025 (Membership, effect of
creation of new congressional districts or boundaries) and 1982 1st ex.s. c 30
s 16;

(3) RCW 72.42.030 (Bylaws--Rules and
regulations--Officers) and 1972 ex.s. c 96 s 3; and

(4) RCW 72.42.040 (Powers and duties) and
1985 c 378 s 34, 1981 c 42 s 1, & 1972 ex.s. c 96 s 4.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 12. This act takes effect
July 1, 2002, except that the governor may appoint the members of the board of
trustees under section 7 of this act prior to the beginning of their terms of
office on July 1, 2002.

---
END ---