BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF
WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1. RCW 46.20.285 and 2001 c
64 s 6 are each amended to read as follows:

The department shall
forthwith revoke the license of any driver for the period of one calendar year
unless otherwise provided in this section, upon receiving a record of the
driver's conviction of any of the following offenses, when the conviction has
become final:

(1) For vehicular
homicide the period of revocation shall be two years. The revocation period
shall be tolled during any period of total confinement for the offense;

(2) Vehicular assault.
The revocation period shall be tolled during any period of total confinement
for the offense;

(3) Driving a motor
vehicle while under the influence of intoxicating liquor or a narcotic drug, or
under the influence of any other drug to a degree which renders the driver
incapable of safely driving a motor vehicle, for the period prescribed in RCW
46.61.5055;

(4) For attempting
to elude a pursuing police vehicle the period of revocation shall be two years;

(5) Any felony
in the commission of which a motor vehicle is used;

(((5))) (6)
Failure to stop and give information or render aid as required under the laws
of this state in the event of a motor vehicle accident resulting in the death
or personal injury of another or resulting in damage to a vehicle that is
driven or attended by another;

(((6))) (7)
Perjury or the making of a false affidavit or statement under oath to the
department under Title 46 RCW or under any other law relating to the ownership
or operation of motor vehicles;

(((7))) (8)
Reckless driving upon a showing by the department's records that the conviction
is the third such conviction for the driver within a period of two years.

Sec. 2. RCW 46.20.311 and 2001 c
325 s 2 are each amended to read as follows:

(1)(a) The department
shall not suspend a driver's license or privilege to drive a motor vehicle on
the public highways for a fixed period of more than one year, except as
specifically permitted under RCW 46.20.267, 46.20.342, or other provision of
law. Except for a suspension under RCW 46.20.267, 46.20.289, 46.20.291(5),
46.61.740, or 74.20A.320, whenever the license or driving privilege of any
person is suspended by reason of a conviction, a finding that a traffic
infraction has been committed, pursuant to chapter 46.29 RCW, or pursuant to
RCW 46.20.291 or 46.20.308, the suspension shall remain in effect until the
person gives and thereafter maintains proof of financial responsibility for the
future as provided in chapter 46.29 RCW. If the suspension is the result of a
violation of RCW 46.61.502 or 46.61.504, the department shall determine the
person's eligibility for licensing based upon the reports provided by the
alcoholism agency or probation department designated under RCW 46.61.5056 and
shall deny reinstatement until enrollment and participation in an approved
program has been established and the person is otherwise qualified. Whenever
the license or driving privilege of any person is suspended as a result of
certification of noncompliance with a child support order under chapter 74.20A
RCW or a residential or visitation order, the suspension shall remain in effect
until the person provides a release issued by the department of social and
health services stating that the person is in compliance with the order.

(b)(i) The department
shall not issue to the person a new, duplicate, or renewal license until the
person pays a reissue fee of twenty dollars.

(ii) If the suspension
is the result of a violation of RCW 46.61.502 or 46.61.504, or is the result of
administrative action under RCW 46.20.308, the reissue fee shall be one hundred
fifty dollars.

(2)(a) Any person whose
license or privilege to drive a motor vehicle on the public highways has been
revoked, unless the revocation was for a cause which has been removed, is not
entitled to have the license or privilege renewed or restored until: (i) After
the expiration of one year from the date the license or privilege to drive was
revoked; or (ii) after the expiration of the applicable revocation
period provided by RCW 46.20.265, 46.20.285, 46.20.3101, or
46.61.5055((; (iii) after the expiration of two years for persons convicted
of vehicular homicide; or (iv) after the expiration of the applicable
revocation period provided by RCW 46.20.265)).

(b)(i) After the
expiration of the appropriate period, the person may make application for a new
license as provided by law together with a reissue fee in the amount of twenty
dollars.

(ii) If the revocation
is the result of a violation of RCW 46.20.308, 46.61.502, or 46.61.504, the
reissue fee shall be one hundred fifty dollars. If the revocation is the
result of a violation of RCW 46.61.502 or 46.61.504, the department shall
determine the person's eligibility for licensing based upon the reports
provided by the alcoholism agency or probation department designated under RCW 46.61.5056
and shall deny reissuance of a license, permit, or privilege to drive until
enrollment and participation in an approved program has been established and
the person is otherwise qualified.

(c) Except for a
revocation under RCW 46.20.265, the department shall not then issue a new
license unless it is satisfied after investigation of the driving ability of
the person that it will be safe to grant the privilege of driving a motor
vehicle on the public highways, and until the person gives and thereafter
maintains proof of financial responsibility for the future as provided in
chapter 46.29 RCW. For a revocation under RCW 46.20.265, the department shall
not issue a new license unless it is satisfied after investigation of the
driving ability of the person that it will be safe to grant that person the
privilege of driving a motor vehicle on the public highways.

(3)(a) Whenever the
driver's license of any person is suspended pursuant to Article IV of the
nonresident violators compact or RCW 46.23.020 or 46.20.289 or 46.20.291(5),
the department shall not issue to the person any new or renewal license until
the person pays a reissue fee of twenty dollars.

(b) If the suspension
is the result of a violation of the laws of this or any other state, province,
or other jurisdiction involving (i) the operation or physical control of a
motor vehicle upon the public highways while under the influence of
intoxicating liquor or drugs, or (ii) the refusal to submit to a chemical test
of the driver's blood alcohol content, the reissue fee shall be one hundred
fifty dollars.

Sec. 3. RCW 46.61.024 and 1983 c
80 s 1 are each amended to read as follows:

Any driver of a motor
vehicle who willfully fails or refuses to immediately bring his vehicle
to a stop and who drives his vehicle in a manner indicating a wanton or willful
disregard for the lives or property of others while attempting to elude a
pursuing police vehicle, after being given a visual or audible signal to bring
the vehicle to a stop, shall be guilty of a class ((C)) B
felony. The signal given by the police officer may be by hand, voice,
emergency light, or siren. The officer giving such a signal shall be in
uniform and ((his vehicle)) shall be ((appropriately marked showing
it to be)) driving an official police vehicle. An official
police vehicle means any municipal, county, or state police vehicle
appropriately equipped with emergency lights and siren.

The license or permit
to drive or any nonresident driving privilege of a person convicted of a
violation of this section shall be revoked for two years by the
department of licensing.

Sec. 4. RCW 46.61.520 and 1998 c
211 s 2 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) When the death of
any person ensues within three years as a proximate result of injury
proximately caused by the driving of any vehicle by any person, the driver is
guilty of vehicular homicide if the driver was operating a motor vehicle:

(a) While under the
influence of intoxicating liquor or any drug, as defined by RCW 46.61.502; or

(b) In a reckless
manner; or

(c) With disregard for
the safety of others; or

(d) While attempting
to elude a pursuing police vehicle as defined in RCW 46.61.024.

(2) Vehicular homicide
is a class A felony punishable under chapter 9A.20 RCW, except that, for a
conviction under subsection (1)(a) of this section, an additional two years
shall be added to the sentence for each prior offense as defined in RCW
46.61.5055.

Sec. 5. RCW 46.61.522 and 2001 c
300 s 1 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) A person is guilty
of vehicular assault if he or she operates or drives any vehicle:

(a) In a reckless
manner and causes substantial bodily harm to another; or

(b) While under the
influence of intoxicating liquor or any drug, as defined by RCW 46.61.502, and
causes substantial bodily harm to another; or

(c) With disregard for
the safety of others and causes substantial bodily harm to another; or

(d) While attempting
to elude a pursuing police vehicle as defined in RCW 46.61.024 and causes
substantial bodily harm to another.

(2) Vehicular assault
is a class B felony punishable under chapter 9A.20 RCW.

(3) As used in this
section, "substantial bodily harm" has the same meaning as in RCW
9A.04.110.

Sec. 6. RCW 9.94A.515 and 2001
2nd sp.s. c 12 s 361, 2001 c 300 s 4, 2001 c 217 s 12, and 2001 c 17 s 1 are
each reenacted and amended to read as follows:

TABLE
2

CRIMES
INCLUDED WITHIN EACH SERIOUSNESS LEVEL

XVIAggravated
Murder 1 (RCW 10.95.020)

XVHomicide
by abuse (RCW 9A.32.055)

Malicious
explosion 1 (RCW 70.74.280(1))

Murder
1 (RCW 9A.32.030)

XIVMurder
2 (RCW 9A.32.050)

XIIIMalicious
explosion 2 (RCW 70.74.280(2))

Malicious
placement of an explosive 1 (RCW 70.74.270(1))

XIIAssault
1 (RCW 9A.36.011)

Assault
of a Child 1 (RCW 9A.36.120)

Malicious
placement of an imitation device 1 (RCW 70.74.272(1)(a))

Rape
1 (RCW 9A.44.040)

Rape
of a Child 1 (RCW 9A.44.073)

XIManslaughter
1 (RCW 9A.32.060)

Rape
2 (RCW 9A.44.050)

Rape
of a Child 2 (RCW 9A.44.076)

XChild
Molestation 1 (RCW 9A.44.083)

Indecent
Liberties (with forcible compulsion) (RCW 9A.44.100(1)(a))

Kidnapping
1 (RCW 9A.40.020)

Leading
Organized Crime (RCW 9A.82.060(1)(a))

Malicious
explosion 3 (RCW 70.74.280(3))

Manufacture
of methamphetamine (RCW 69.50.401(a)(1)(ii))

Over
18 and deliver heroin, methamphetamine, a narcotic from Schedule I or II, or
flunitrazepam from Schedule IV to someone under 18 (RCW 69.50.406)

Sexually
Violent Predator Escape (RCW 9A.76.115)

Vehicular
Homicide, by attempting to elude a pursuing police vehicle (RCW 46.61.520)

IXAssault
of a Child 2 (RCW 9A.36.130)

Controlled
Substance Homicide (RCW 69.50.415)

Explosive
devices prohibited (RCW 70.74.180)

Hit
and Run‑-Death (RCW 46.52.020(4)(a))

Homicide
by Watercraft, by being under the influence of intoxicating liquor or any drug
(RCW 79A.60.050)

Inciting
Criminal Profiteering (RCW 9A.82.060(1)(b))

Malicious
placement of an explosive 2 (RCW 70.74.270(2))

Over
18 and deliver narcotic from Schedule III, IV, or V or a nonnarcotic, except
flunitrazepam or methamphetamine, from Schedule I-V to someone under 18 and 3
years junior (RCW 69.50.406)

Robbery
1 (RCW 9A.56.200)

Sexual
Exploitation (RCW 9.68A.040)

Vehicular
Homicide, by being under the influence of intoxicating liquor or any drug (RCW
46.61.520)

VIIIArson
1 (RCW 9A.48.020)

Deliver
or possess with intent to deliver methamphetamine (RCW 69.50.401(a)(1)(ii))

Homicide
by Watercraft, by the operation of any vessel in a reckless manner (RCW
79A.60.050)

Manslaughter
2 (RCW 9A.32.070)

Manufacture,
deliver, or possess with intent to deliver amphetamine (RCW
69.50.401(a)(1)(ii))

Manufacture,
deliver, or possess with intent to deliver heroin or cocaine (RCW
69.50.401(a)(1)(i))

Possession
of Ephedrine, Pseudoephedrine, or Anhydrous Ammonia with intent to manufacture
methamphetamine (RCW 69.50.440)

Promoting
Prostitution 1 (RCW 9A.88.070)

Selling
for profit (controlled or counterfeit) any controlled substance (RCW 69.50.410)

Theft
of Anhydrous Ammonia (RCW 69.55.010)

Vehicular
Homicide, by the operation of any vehicle in a reckless manner (RCW 46.61.520)

VIIBurglary
1 (RCW 9A.52.020)

Child
Molestation 2 (RCW 9A.44.086)

Dealing
in depictions of minor engaged in sexually explicit conduct (RCW 9.68A.050)

Drive-by
Shooting (RCW 9A.36.045)

Homicide
by Watercraft, by disregard for the safety of others (RCW 79A.60.050)

Indecent
Liberties (without forcible compulsion) (RCW 9A.44.100(1) (b) and (c))

Introducing
Contraband 1 (RCW 9A.76.140)

Involving
a minor in drug dealing (RCW 69.50.401(f))

Malicious
placement of an explosive 3 (RCW 70.74.270(3))

Sending,
bringing into state depictions of minor engaged in sexually explicit conduct
(RCW 9.68A.060)

Unlawful
Possession of a Firearm in the first degree (RCW 9.41.040(1)(a))

Use
of a Machine Gun in Commission of a Felony (RCW 9.41.225)

Vehicular
Homicide, by disregard for the safety of others (RCW 46.61.520)

VIBail
Jumping with Murder 1 (RCW 9A.76.170(3)(a))

Bribery
(RCW 9A.68.010)

Incest
1 (RCW 9A.64.020(1))

Intimidating
a Judge (RCW 9A.72.160)

Intimidating
a Juror/Witness (RCW 9A.72.110, 9A.72.130)

Malicious
placement of an imitation device 2 (RCW 70.74.272(1)(b))

Manufacture,
deliver, or possess with intent to deliver narcotics from Schedule I or II
(except heroin or cocaine) or flunitrazepam from Schedule IV (RCW
69.50.401(a)(1)(i))

Rape
of a Child 3 (RCW 9A.44.079)

Theft
of a Firearm (RCW 9A.56.300)

Unlawful
Storage of Anhydrous Ammonia (RCW 69.55.020)

VAbandonment
of dependent person 1 (RCW 9A.42.060)

Advancing
money or property for extortionate extension of credit (RCW 9A.82.030)

Bail
Jumping with class A Felony (RCW 9A.76.170(3)(b))

Child
Molestation 3 (RCW 9A.44.089)

Criminal
Mistreatment 1 (RCW 9A.42.020)

Custodial
Sexual Misconduct 1 (RCW 9A.44.160)

Delivery
of imitation controlled substance by person eighteen or over to person under
eighteen (RCW 69.52.030(2))

Domestic
Violence Court Order Violation (RCW 10.99.040, 10.99.050, 26.09.300, 26.10.220,
26.26.138, 26.50.110, 26.52.070, or 74.34.145)

Extortion
1 (RCW 9A.56.120)

Extortionate
Extension of Credit (RCW 9A.82.020)

Extortionate
Means to Collect Extensions of Credit (RCW 9A.82.040)

Incest
2 (RCW 9A.64.020(2))

Kidnapping
2 (RCW 9A.40.030)

Perjury
1 (RCW 9A.72.020)

Persistent
prison misbehavior (RCW 9.94.070)

Possession
of a Stolen Firearm (RCW 9A.56.310)

Rape
3 (RCW 9A.44.060)

Rendering
Criminal Assistance 1 (RCW 9A.76.070)

Sexual
Misconduct with a Minor 1 (RCW 9A.44.093)

Sexually
Violating Human Remains (RCW 9A.44.105)

Stalking
(RCW 9A.46.110)

Vehicular
Assault, by attempting to elude a pursuing police vehicle (RCW 46.61.522)

IVArson
2 (RCW 9A.48.030)

Assault
2 (RCW 9A.36.021)

Assault
by Watercraft (RCW 79A.60.060)

Bribing
a Witness/Bribe Received by Witness (RCW 9A.72.090, 9A.72.100)

Commercial
Bribery (RCW 9A.68.060)

Counterfeiting
(RCW 9.16.035(4))

Escape
1 (RCW 9A.76.110)

Hit
and Run‑-Injury (RCW 46.52.020(4)(b))

Hit
and Run with Vessel‑-Injury Accident (RCW 79A.60.200(3))

Identity
Theft 1 (RCW 9.35.020(2)(a))

Indecent
Exposure to Person Under Age Fourteen (subsequent sex offense) (RCW 9A.88.010)

Influencing
Outcome of Sporting Event (RCW 9A.82.070)

Knowingly
Trafficking in Stolen Property (RCW 9A.82.050(2))

Malicious
Harassment (RCW 9A.36.080)

Manufacture,
deliver, or possess with intent to deliver narcotics from Schedule III, IV, or
V or nonnarcotics from Schedule I-V (except marijuana, amphetamine,
methamphetamines, or flunitrazepam) (RCW 69.50.401(a)(1) (iii) through (v))

Residential
Burglary (RCW 9A.52.025)

Robbery
2 (RCW 9A.56.210)

Theft
of Livestock 1 (RCW 9A.56.080)

Threats
to Bomb (RCW 9.61.160)

Use
of Proceeds of Criminal Profiteering (RCW 9A.82.080 (1) and (2))

Vehicular
Assault, by being under the influence of intoxicating liquor or any drug, or by
the operation or driving of a vehicle in a reckless manner (RCW 46.61.522)

Willful
Failure to Return from Furlough (RCW 72.66.060)

IIIAbandonment
of dependent person 2 (RCW 9A.42.070)

Assault
3 (RCW 9A.36.031)

Assault
of a Child 3 (RCW 9A.36.140)

Bail
Jumping with class B or C Felony (RCW 9A.76.170(3)(c))

Burglary
2 (RCW 9A.52.030)

Communication
with a Minor for Immoral Purposes (RCW 9.68A.090)

Criminal
Gang Intimidation (RCW 9A.46.120)

Criminal
Mistreatment 2 (RCW 9A.42.030)

Custodial
Assault (RCW 9A.36.100)

Delivery
of a material in lieu of a controlled substance (RCW 69.50.401(c))

Escape
2 (RCW 9A.76.120)

Extortion
2 (RCW 9A.56.130)

Harassment
(RCW 9A.46.020)

Intimidating
a Public Servant (RCW 9A.76.180)

Introducing
Contraband 2 (RCW 9A.76.150)

Maintaining
a Dwelling or Place for Controlled Substances (RCW 69.50.402(a)(6))

Malicious
Injury to Railroad Property (RCW 81.60.070)

Manufacture,
deliver, or possess with intent to deliver marijuana (RCW 69.50.401(a)(1)(iii))

Manufacture,
distribute, or possess with intent to distribute an imitation controlled
substance (RCW 69.52.030(1))

Patronizing
a Juvenile Prostitute (RCW 9.68A.100)

Perjury
2 (RCW 9A.72.030)

Possession
of Incendiary Device (RCW 9.40.120)

Possession
of Machine Gun or Short-Barreled Shotgun or Rifle (RCW 9.41.190)

Promoting
Prostitution 2 (RCW 9A.88.080)

Recklessly
Trafficking in Stolen Property (RCW 9A.82.050(1))

Securities
Act violation (RCW 21.20.400)

Tampering
with a Witness (RCW 9A.72.120)

Telephone
Harassment (subsequent conviction or threat of death) (RCW 9.61.230)

Theft
of Livestock 2 (RCW 9A.56.080)

Unlawful
Imprisonment (RCW 9A.40.040)

Unlawful
possession of firearm in the second degree (RCW 9.41.040(1)(b))

Unlawful
Use of Building for Drug Purposes (RCW 69.53.010)

Vehicular
Assault, by the operation or driving of a vehicle with disregard for the safety
of others (RCW 46.61.522)

Willful
Failure to Return from Work Release (RCW 72.65.070)

IIAttempting
to Elude a Pursuing Police Vehicle (RCW 46.61.024)

Computer
Trespass 1 (RCW 9A.52.110)

Counterfeiting
(RCW 9.16.035(3))

Create,
deliver, or possess a counterfeit controlled substance (RCW 69.50.401(b))

Escape
from Community Custody (RCW 72.09.310)

Health
Care False Claims (RCW 48.80.030)

Identity
Theft 2 (RCW 9.35.020(2)(b))

Improperly
Obtaining Financial Information (RCW 9.35.010)

Malicious
Mischief 1 (RCW 9A.48.070)

Possession
of controlled substance that is either heroin or narcotics from Schedule I or
II or flunitrazepam from Schedule IV (RCW 69.50.401(d))

Possession
of phencyclidine (PCP) (RCW 69.50.401(d))

Possession
of Stolen Property 1 (RCW 9A.56.150)

Theft
1 (RCW 9A.56.030)

Theft
of Rental, Leased, or Lease-purchased Property (valued at one thousand five
hundred dollars or more) (RCW 9A.56.096(4))

Trafficking
in Insurance Claims (RCW 48.30A.015)

Unlawful
Practice of Law (RCW 2.48.180)

Unlicensed
Practice of a Profession or Business (RCW 18.130.190(7))

I((Attempting
to Elude a Pursuing Police Vehicle (RCW 46.61.024)))

False
Verification for Welfare (RCW 74.08.055)

Forged
Prescription (RCW 69.41.020)

Forged
Prescription for a Controlled Substance (RCW 69.50.403)

Forgery
(RCW 9A.60.020)

Malicious
Mischief 2 (RCW 9A.48.080)

Possess
Controlled Substance that is a Narcotic from Schedule III, IV, or V or
Non-narcotic from Schedule I-V (except phencyclidine or flunitrazepam) (RCW
69.50.401(d))

Possession
of Stolen Property 2 (RCW 9A.56.160)

Reckless
Burning 1 (RCW 9A.48.040)

Taking
Motor Vehicle Without Permission (RCW 9A.56.070)

Theft
2 (RCW 9A.56.040)

Theft
of Rental, Leased, or Lease-purchased Property (valued at two hundred fifty
dollars or more but less than one thousand five hundred dollars) (RCW
9A.56.096(4))

Unlawful
Issuance of Checks or Drafts (RCW 9A.56.060)

Unlawful
Use of Food Stamps (RCW 9.91.140 (2) and (3))

Vehicle Prowl 1 (RCW 9A.52.095)

---
END ---