BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF
WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1. RCW 71.34.225 and 2000 c
75 s 2 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) The definitions in
this subsection apply throughout this section unless the context clearly
requires otherwise.

(a) "Information
related to mental health services" means all information and records
compiled, obtained, or maintained in the course of providing services to either
voluntary or involuntary recipients of services by a mental health service
provider. This may include documents of legal proceedings under this chapter
or chapter 71.05 or 10.77 RCW, or somatic health care information.

(b) "Mental health
service provider" means a public or private agency that provides services
to persons with mental disorders as defined under RCW 71.34.020 and receives
funding from public sources. This includes evaluation and treatment facilities
as defined in RCW 71.34.020, community mental health service delivery systems,
or community mental health programs, as defined in RCW 71.24.025, and
facilities conducting competency evaluations and restoration under chapter 10.77
RCW.

(2) Information related
to mental health services delivered to a person subject to chapter 9.94A or
9.95 RCW shall be released, upon request, by a mental health service
provider to department of corrections personnel for whom the information is necessary
to carry out the responsibilities of their office. The information must be
provided only for the purpose of completing presentence investigations,
supervision of an incarcerated person, planning for and provision of
supervision of a person, or assessment of a person's risk to the community.
The request shall be in writing and shall not require the consent of the
subject of the records.

(3) The information to
be released to the department of corrections shall include all relevant records
and reports, as defined by rule, necessary for the department of corrections to
carry out its duties, including those records and reports identified in
subsection (2) of this section.

(4) The department and
the department of corrections, in consultation with regional support networks,
mental health service providers as defined in subsection (1) of this section,
mental health consumers, and advocates for persons with mental illness, shall
adopt rules to implement the provisions of this section related to the type and
scope of information to be released. These rules shall:

(a) Enhance and
facilitate the ability of the department of corrections to carry out its
responsibility of planning and ensuring community protection with respect to
persons subject to sentencing under chapter 9.94A or 9.95 RCW, including
accessing and releasing or disclosing information of persons who received
mental health services as a minor; and

(b) Establish
requirements for the notification of persons under the supervision of the
department of corrections regarding the provisions of this section.

(5) The information
received by the department of corrections under this section shall remain
confidential and subject to the limitations on disclosure outlined in RCW
71.34.200, except as provided in RCW 72.09.585.

(6) No mental health
service provider or individual employed by a mental health service provider
shall be held responsible for information released to or used by the department
of corrections under the provisions of this section or rules adopted under this
section.

(7) Whenever federal
law or federal regulations restrict the release of information contained in the
treatment records of any patient who receives treatment for alcoholism or drug
dependency, the release of the information may be restricted as necessary to
comply with federal law and regulations.

(8) This
section does not modify the terms and conditions of disclosure of information
related to sexually transmitted diseases under chapter 70.24 RCW.

Sec. 2. RCW 71.05.445 and 2000 c
75 s 3 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) The definitions in
this subsection apply throughout this section unless the context clearly
requires otherwise.

(a) "Information
related to mental health services" means all information and records
compiled, obtained, or maintained in the course of providing services to either
voluntary or involuntary recipients of services by a mental health service
provider. This may include documents of legal proceedings under this chapter
or chapter 71.34 or 10.77 RCW, or somatic health care information.

(b) "Mental health
service provider" means a public or private agency that provides services
to persons with mental disorders as defined under RCW 71.05.020 and receives
funding from public sources. This includes evaluation and treatment facilities
as defined in RCW 71.05.020, community mental health service delivery systems,
or community mental health programs as defined in RCW 71.24.025, and facilities
conducting competency evaluations and restoration under chapter 10.77 RCW.

(2) Information related
to mental health services delivered to a person subject to chapter 9.94A or
9.95 RCW shall be released, upon request, by a mental health service
provider to department of corrections personnel for whom the information is
necessary to carry out the responsibilities of their office. The information
must be provided only for the purpose of completing presentence investigations,
supervision of an incarcerated person, planning for and provision of
supervision of a person, or assessment of a person's risk to the community.
The request shall be in writing and shall not require the consent of the
subject of the records.

(3) The information to
be released to the department of corrections shall include all relevant records
and reports, as defined by rule, necessary for the department of corrections to
carry out its duties, including those records and reports identified in
subsection (2) of this section.

(4) The department and
the department of corrections, in consultation with regional support networks,
mental health service providers as defined in subsection (1) of this section,
mental health consumers, and advocates for persons with mental illness, shall
adopt rules to implement the provisions of this section related to the type and
scope of information to be released. These rules shall:

(a) Enhance and
facilitate the ability of the department of corrections to carry out its
responsibility of planning and ensuring community protection with respect to
persons subject to sentencing under chapter 9.94A or 9.95 RCW, including
accessing and releasing or disclosing information of persons who received
mental health services as a minor; and

(b) Establish
requirements for the notification of persons under the supervision of the
department of corrections regarding the provisions of this section.

(5) The information
received by the department of corrections under this section shall remain
confidential and subject to the limitations on disclosure outlined in chapter
71.05 RCW, except as provided in RCW 72.09.585.

(6) No mental health
service provider or individual employed by a mental health service provider
shall be held responsible for information released to or used by the department
of corrections under the provisions of this section or rules adopted under this
section except under RCW 71.05.670 and 71.05.440.

(7) Whenever federal
law or federal regulations restrict the release of information contained in the
treatment records of any patient who receives treatment for alcoholism or drug
dependency, the release of the information may be restricted as necessary to
comply with federal law and regulations.

(8) This
section does not modify the terms and conditions of disclosure of information
related to sexually transmitted diseases under chapter 70.24 RCW.

---
END ---