BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF
WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1. RCW 4.56.100 and 1997 c
358 s 4 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) When any judgment
for the payment of money only shall have been paid or satisfied, the clerk of
the court in which such judgment was rendered shall note upon the record in the
execution docket satisfaction thereof giving the date of such satisfaction upon
either the payment to such clerk of the amount of such judgment, costs and
interest and any accrued costs by reason of the issuance of any execution, or
the filing with such clerk of a satisfaction entitled in such action and
identifying the same executed by the judgment creditor or his or her attorney
of record in such action or his or her assignee acknowledged as deeds are
acknowledged. The clerk has the authority to note the satisfaction of
judgments for criminal and juvenile legal financial obligations when the
clerk's record indicates payment in full or as directed by the court. Every
satisfaction of judgment and every partial satisfaction of judgment which
provides for the payment of money shall clearly designate the judgment creditor
and his or her attorney if any, the judgment debtor, the amount or type of
satisfaction, whether the satisfaction is full or partial, the cause number,
and the date of entry of the judgment. A certificate by such clerk of the
entry of such satisfaction by him or her may be filed in the office of the
clerk of any county in which an abstract of such judgment has been filed. When
so satisfied by the clerk or the filing of such certificate the lien of such
judgment shall be discharged.

(2) The department of
social and health services shall file a satisfaction of judgment for welfare
fraud conviction if a person does not pay money through the clerk as required
under subsection (1) of this section.

(((3) The department
of corrections shall file a satisfaction of judgment if a person does not pay
money through the clerk's office as required under subsection (1) of this
section.))

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 2. This act takes effect
July 1, 2002. The legislature intends that this act apply retroactively to
sentences imposed and offenders on community custody, community placement,
community service, community supervision, legal financial obligations, or
probation before, on, or after July 1, 2002.

---
END ---