BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF
WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1. RCW 46.20.391 and 1999 c
274 s 4 and 1999 c 272 s 1 are each reenacted and amended to read as follows:

(1) Any person licensed
under this chapter who is convicted of an offense relating to motor vehicles
for which suspension or revocation of the driver's license is mandatory, other
than vehicular homicide or vehicular assault, or who has had his or her license
suspended under RCW 46.20.3101 (2)(a) or (3)(a), may submit to the department
an application for an occupational driver's license. The department, upon
receipt of the prescribed fee and upon determining that the petitioner is
engaged in an occupation or trade that makes it essential that the petitioner
operate a motor vehicle, may issue an occupational driver's license and may set
definite restrictions as provided in RCW 46.20.394. No person may petition
for, and the department shall not issue, an occupational driver's license that
is effective during the first thirty days of any suspension or revocation
imposed either for a violation of RCW 46.61.502 or 46.61.504 or under RCW
46.20.3101 (2)(a) or (3)(a), or for both a violation of RCW 46.61.502 or
46.61.504 and under RCW 46.20.3101 (2)(a) or (3)(a) where the action arises
from the same incident. A person aggrieved by the decision of the department
on the application for an occupational driver's license may request a hearing
as provided by rule of the department.

(2)(a) A person
licensed under this chapter whose driver's license is suspended
administratively due to failure to appear or pay a traffic ticket under RCW
46.20.289; a violation of the financial responsibility laws under chapter 46.29
RCW; or for multiple violations within a specified period of time under RCW
46.20.291, may apply to the department for an occupational driver's license if the
applicant demonstrates to the satisfaction of the department that one of the
following additional conditions are met:

(i) The applicant is in
an apprenticeship program or an on-the-job training program for which a
driver's license is required;

(ii) The applicant
presents evidence that he or she has applied for a position in an
apprenticeship or on-the-job training program and the program has certified
that a driver's license is required to begin the program, provided that a
license granted under this provision shall be in effect no longer than fourteen
days;

(iii) The applicant is
in a program that assists persons who are enrolled in a WorkFirst program
pursuant to chapter 74.08A RCW to become gainfully employed and the program
requires a driver's license; or

(iv) The applicant is
undergoing substance abuse treatment or is participating in meetings of a
twelve-step group such as alcoholics anonymous.

(b) If the suspension
is for failure to respond, pay, or comply with a notice of traffic infraction
or conviction, the applicant must enter into a payment plan with the court if
the court offers such a plan for occupational licenses.

(c) An occupational
driver's license issued to an applicant described in (a) of this subsection
shall be valid for the period of the suspension or revocation but not more than
two years. The suspension or revocation of the regular driver's license
shall not be affected by the issuance of an occupational license. The two-year
period is to provide an opportunity for the applicant to work in order to
satisfy any penalties or other sanctions imposed by the court which are the
causes of the suspension or revocation of his or her regular driver's license.

(d) Upon receipt of
evidence that a holder of an occupational driver's license granted under this
subsection is no longer enrolled in an apprenticeship or on-the-job training
program, the director shall give written notice by first class mail to the
driver that the occupational driver's license shall be canceled. The effective
date of cancellation shall be fifteen days from the date of mailing the
notice. If at any time before the cancellation goes into effect the driver
submits evidence of continued enrollment in the program, the cancellation shall
be stayed. If the cancellation becomes effective, the driver may obtain, at no
additional charge, a new occupational driver's license upon submittal of
evidence of enrollment in another program that meets the criteria set forth in
this subsection.

(e) The department
shall not issue an occupational driver's license under (a)(iv) of this
subsection if the applicant is able to receive transit services sufficient to
allow for the applicant's participation in the programs referenced under
(a)(iv) of this subsection.

(3) An applicant for an
occupational driver's license is eligible to receive such license only if:

(a) Within one year
immediately preceding the date of the offense that gave rise to the present
conviction, the applicant has not committed any offense relating to motor
vehicles for which suspension or revocation of a driver's license is mandatory;
and

(b) Within seven years
immediately preceding the date of the offense that gave rise to the present
conviction or incident, the applicant has not committed any of the following
offenses: (i) Driving or being in actual physical control of a motor vehicle
while under the influence of intoxicating liquor; (ii) vehicular homicide under
RCW 46.61.520; or (iii) vehicular assault under RCW 46.61.522; and

(c) The applicant is
engaged in an occupation or trade that makes it essential that he or she
operate a motor vehicle, except as allowed under subsection (2)(a) of this
section; and

(d) The applicant files
satisfactory proof of financial responsibility under chapter 46.29 RCW.

(4) The director
shall cancel an occupational driver's license upon receipt of notice that the
holder thereof has been convicted of operating a motor vehicle in violation of
its restrictions, or of a separate offense that under chapter 46.20 RCW would
warrant suspension or revocation of a regular driver's license. The
cancellation is effective as of the date of the conviction, and continues with
the same force and effect as any suspension or revocation under this title.

--- END ---