BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF
WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1. RCW 84.36.387 and 1992 c
206 s 14 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) All claims for
exemption shall be made and signed by the person entitled to the exemption, by
his or her attorney in fact or in the event the residence of such person is
under mortgage or purchase contract requiring accumulation of reserves out of
which the holder of the mortgage or contract is required to pay real estate
taxes, by such holder or by the owner, either before two witnesses or the
county assessor or his deputy in the county where the real property is
located: PROVIDED, That if a claim for exemption is made by a person living in
a cooperative housing association, corporation, or partnership, such claim
shall be made and signed by the person entitled to the exemption and by the
authorized agent of such cooperative.

(2) If the taxpayer is
unable to submit his own claim, the claim shall be submitted by a duly
authorized agent or by a guardian or other person charged with the care of the
person or property of such taxpayer.

(3) All claims for
exemption and renewal applications shall be accompanied by such documented
verification of income as shall be prescribed by rule adopted by the department
of revenue. The assessor shall not retain any copies of federal income tax
returns under this section.

(4) Any person signing
a false claim with the intent to defraud or evade the payment of any tax shall
be guilty of the offense of perjury.

(5) The tax liability
of a cooperative housing association, corporation, or partnership shall be
reduced by the amount of tax exemption to which a claimant residing therein is
entitled and such cooperative shall reduce any amount owed by the claimant to
the cooperative by such exact amount of tax exemption or, if no amount be owed,
the cooperative shall make payment to the claimant of such exact amount of
exemption.

(6) A
remainderman or other person who would have otherwise paid the tax on real
property that is the subject of an exemption granted under RCW 84.36.381 for an
estate for life shall reduce the amount which would have been payable by the
life tenant to the remainderman or other person to the extent of the
exemption. If no amount is owed or separately stated as an obligation between
these persons, the remainderman or other person shall make payment to the life
tenant in the exact amount of the exemption.

--- END ---