BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF
WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1. RCW 16.52.117 and 1994 c
261 s 11 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) Any person who does
any of the following is guilty of a ((gross misdemeanor punishable by
imprisonment not to exceed one year, or by a fine not to exceed five thousand
dollars, or by both fine and imprisonment)) class C felony punishable
under RCW 9A.20.021:

(a) Owns, possesses,
keeps, sells, or trains any animal with the intent that the animal shall
be engaged in an exhibition of fighting with another animal;

(b) For amusement or
gain causes any animal to fight with another animal, or causes any animals to
injure each other; or

(c) Permits any act in
violation of (a) or (b) of this subsection to be done on any premises under his
or her charge or control, or promotes or aids or abets any such act.

(2) Any person who is
knowingly present, as a spectator, at any place or building where preparations
are being made for an exhibition of the fighting of animals, with the intent to
be present at such preparations, or is knowingly present at such exhibition or
at any other fighting or injuring as described in subsection (1)(b) of this
section, with the intent to be present at such exhibition, fighting, or
injuring, is guilty of a ((misdemeanor)) class C felony punishable
under RCW 9A.20.021.

(3) Nothing in this
section may prohibit the following:

(a) The use of dogs in
the management of livestock, as defined by chapter 16.57 RCW, by the owner of
the livestock or the owner's employees or agents or other persons in lawful
custody of the livestock;

(b) The use of dogs in
hunting as permitted by law; or

(c) The
training of animals or the use of equipment in the training of animals for any
purpose not prohibited by law.

--- END ---