BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF
WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec.
1. (1) The legislature finds
and declares that:

(a) Criminal gang
activity is a prevalent problem throughout this state and gang violence has had
a tremendous impact on our communities and families;

(b) Gang members often
view their gang as their "family." Gangs provide their members with
negative guidance and undesirable values. This gang subculture perpetuates
itself and leads to increased violence and crime;

(c) Current law does
not sufficiently deter criminal street gang activity.

(2) By increasing
penalties when an offense is committed for the benefit of, at the direction of,
or in association with any criminal street gang, with the intent to promote,
further, or assist in criminal conduct by gang members, the legislature intends
to convey that involvement in criminal street gangs is unacceptable. The
legislature intends to deter criminal street gang activity by providing a
sentencing enhancement.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
2. A new section is added
to chapter 9.94A RCW to read as follows:

(1)(a) A person
convicted of a felony offense that is committed for the benefit of, at the
direction of, or in association with any criminal street gang, with the intent
to promote, further, or assist in criminal conduct by gang members, shall, in
addition and consecutive to the punishment prescribed for the felony or
attempted felony of which he or she has been convicted, be punished by an
additional term of two years, except as provided in (b) of this subsection.

(b) If the court finds
that there are aggravating factors, the court may order the imposition of a
sentence enhancement in excess of two years, but not to exceed three years. If
the court finds that there are mitigating circumstances, the court may order the
imposition of a sentence enhancement that is less than two years, but not less
than one year. The court shall state the reasons for its choice of sentence
enhancements on the record at the time of the sentencing.

(c) The sentence
enhancement imposed by the court under this section is mandatory and shall not
run concurrently with any other sentence.

(2) As used in this
section, "criminal street gang" means any ongoing organization,
association, or group of three or more persons, whether formal or informal,
having a common name or common identifying sign or symbol, and having as one of
its primary activities the commission of one or more of the criminal acts
enumerated in subsection (3) of this section, and whose members individually or
collectively engage in or have engaged in a pattern of criminal gang activity.

(3) As used in this
section, "pattern of criminal gang activity" means the conviction or
juvenile adjudication of two or more of the following offenses, provided at
least one of these offenses occurred on or after the effective date of this
act, and the last of those offenses occurred within three years after a prior
offense, and the offenses were committed on separate occasions, or by two or
more persons:

(a) Murder, as defined
in RCW 9A.32.030 or 9A.32.050;

(b) Robbery, as defined
in RCW 9A.56.200 or 9A.56.210;

(c) Kidnapping, as
defined in RCW 9A.40.020 or 9A.40.030;

(d) Theft, as defined
in RCW 9A.56.030, 9A.56.040, or 9A.56.050;

(e) Assault, as defined
in RCW 9A.36.011 or 9A.36.021;

(f) Delivery or
manufacture of controlled substances or possession with intent to deliver or
manufacture controlled substances under chapter 69.50 RCW;

(g) Drive-by shooting,
as defined in RCW 9A.36.045;

(h) Reckless
endangerment, as defined in RCW 9A.36.050;

(i) Arson, as defined
in RCW 9A.48.020 or 9A.48.030;

(j) Intimidating a
witness, as defined in RCW 9A.72.110;

(k) Taking a motor
vehicle without permission, as defined in RCW 9A.56.070;

(l) Burglary, as
defined in RCW 9A.52.020, 9A.52.025, or 9A.52.030;

(m) Rape, as defined in
RCW 9A.44.040, 9A.44.050, or 9A.44.060;

(n) Money laundering,
as defined in RCW 9A.83.020;

(o) Extortion, as
defined in RCW 9A.56.120 or 9A.56.130;

(p) Malicious mischief,
as defined in RCW 9A.48.070, 9A.48.080, or 9A.48.090;

(q) Unlawful possession
of a firearm, as defined in RCW 9.41.040(1) (a) or (b).

NEW SECTION. Sec.
3. A new section is added
to chapter 13.40 RCW to read as follows:

(1) A juvenile
adjudicated of a felony offense that is committed for the benefit of, at the
direction of, or in association with a criminal street gang, as defined in
section 2 of this act, with the intent to promote, further, or assist in
criminal conduct by gang members, must receive a sentence enhancement of ninety
to one hundred twenty days confinement, at the discretion of the court, as
provided in subsection (2) of this section.

(2)(a) The court must
determine the standard range disposition for the offense for which the
respondent was adjudicated under RCW 13.40.160. One hundred five days must be
added to the entire standard range disposition of confinement, except as
provided in (b) of this subsection.

(b) If the court finds
that there are aggravating circumstances, the court may order the imposition of
a disposition enhancement that is in excess of one hundred five days, but not
to exceed one hundred twenty days. If the court finds that there are mitigating
circumstances, the court may impose a disposition enhancement of less than one
hundred five days, but not less than ninety days. The court must state the
reasons for its choice of sentence enhancements on the record at the time of
the disposition.

(3) Any term of
confinement ordered under this section must run consecutively to any term of
confinement imposed in the same disposition for other offenses.

Sec. 4. RCW 9.94A.510 and 2000 c
132 s 2 and 2000 c 28 s 11 are each reenacted and amended to read as follows:

(1) TABLE
1

Sentencing
Grid

SERIOUSNESS

LEVEL OFFENDER SCORE

9
or

0 1 2 3 4 5 6 7 8 more

XVI Life Sentence without Parole/Death Penalty

XV 23y4m 24y4m 25y4m 26y4m 27y4m 28y4m 30y4m 32y10m 36y 40y

240- 250- 261- 271- 281- 291- 312- 338- 370- 411-

320 333 347 361 374 388 416 450 493 548

XIV 14y4m 15y4m 16y2m 17y 17y11m 18y9m 20y5m 22y2m 25y7m 29y

123- 134- 144- 154- 165- 175- 195- 216- 257- 298-

220 234 244 254 265 275 295 316 357 397

XIII 12y 13y 14y 15y 16y 17y 19y 21y 25y 29y

123- 134- 144- 154- 165- 175- 195- 216- 257- 298-

164 178 192 205 219 233 260 288 342 397

XII 9y 9y11m 10y9m 11y8m 12y6m 13y5m 15y9m 17y3m 20y3m 23y3m

93- 102- 111- 120- 129- 138- 162- 178- 209- 240-

123 136 147 160 171 184 216 236 277
318

XI 7y6m 8y4m 9y2m 9y11m 10y9m 11y7m 14y2m 15y5m 17y11m 20y5m

78- 86- 95- 102- 111- 120- 146- 159- 185- 210-

102 114 125 136 147 158 194 211 245
280

X 5y 5y6m 6y 6y6m 7y 7y6m 9y6m 10y6m 12y6m 14y6m

51- 57- 62- 67- 72- 77- 98- 108- 129- 149-

68 75 82 89 96 102 130 144 171 198

IX 3y 3y6m 4y 4y6m 5y 5y6m 7y6m 8y6m 10y6m 12y6m

31- 36- 41- 46- 51- 57- 77- 87- 108- 129-

41 48 54 61 68 75 102 116 144 171

VIII 2y 2y6m 3y 3y6m 4y 4y6m 6y6m 7y6m 8y6m 10y6m

21- 26- 31- 36- 41- 46- 67- 77- 87- 108-

27 34 41 48 54 61 89 102 116 144

VII 18m 2y 2y6m 3y 3y6m 4y 5y6m 6y6m 7y6m 8y6m

15- 21- 26- 31- 36- 41- 57- 67- 77- 87-

20 27 34 41 48 54 75 89 102 116

VI 13m 18m 2y 2y6m 3y 3y6m 4y6m 5y6m 6y6m 7y6m

12+- 15- 21- 26- 31- 36- 46- 57- 67- 77-

14 20 27 34 41 48 61 75 89 102

V 9m 13m 15m 18m 2y2m 3y2m 4y 5y 6y 7y

6- 12+- 13- 15- 22- 33- 41- 51- 62- 72-

12 14 17 20 29 43 54 68 82 96

IV 6m 9m 13m 15m 18m 2y2m 3y2m 4y2m 5y2m 6y2m

3- 6- 12+- 13- 15- 22- 33- 43- 53- 63-

9 12 14 17 20 29 43 57 70 84

III 2m 5m 8m 11m 14m 20m 2y2m 3y2m 4y2m 5y

1- 3- 4- 9- 12+- 17- 22- 33- 43- 51-

3 8 12 12 16 22 29 43 57 68

II 4m 6m 8m 13m 16m 20m 2y2m 3y2m 4y2m

0-90 2- 3- 4- 12+- 14- 17- 22- 33- 43-

Days 6 9 12 14 18 22 29 43 57

I 3m 4m 5m 8m 13m 16m 20m 2y2m

0-60 0-90 2- 2- 3- 4- 12+- 14- 17- 22-

Days Days 5 6 8 12 14 18 22 29

Numbers in the first
horizontal row of each seriousness category represent sentencing midpoints in
years(y) and months(m). Numbers in the second and third rows represent
standard sentence ranges in months, or in days if so designated. 12+ equals
one year and one day.

(2) For persons
convicted of the anticipatory offenses of criminal attempt, solicitation, or
conspiracy under chapter 9A.28 RCW, the standard sentence range is determined
by locating the sentencing grid sentence range defined by the appropriate
offender score and the seriousness level of the completed crime, and
multiplying the range by 75 percent.

(3) The following
additional times shall be added to the standard sentence range for felony
crimes committed after July 23, 1995, if the offender or an accomplice was
armed with a firearm as defined in RCW 9.41.010 and the offender is being
sentenced for one of the crimes listed in this subsection as eligible for any
firearm enhancements based on the classification of the completed felony
crime. If the offender is being sentenced for more than one offense, the
firearm enhancement or enhancements must be added to the total period of
confinement for all offenses, regardless of which underlying offense is subject
to a firearm enhancement. If the offender or an accomplice was armed with a
firearm as defined in RCW 9.41.010 and the offender is being sentenced for an
anticipatory offense under chapter 9A.28 RCW to commit one of the crimes listed
in this subsection as eligible for any firearm enhancements, the following
additional times shall be added to the standard sentence range determined under
subsection (2) of this section based on the felony crime of conviction as
classified under RCW 9A.28.020:

(a) Five years for any
felony defined under any law as a class A felony or with a statutory maximum
sentence of at least twenty years, or both, and not covered under (f) of this
subsection.

(b) Three years for any
felony defined under any law as a class B felony or with a statutory maximum
sentence of ten years, or both, and not covered under (f) of this subsection.

(c) Eighteen months for
any felony defined under any law as a class C felony or with a statutory
maximum sentence of five years, or both, and not covered under (f) of this
subsection.

(d) If the offender is
being sentenced for any firearm enhancements under (a), (b), and/or (c) of this
subsection and the offender has previously been sentenced for any deadly weapon
enhancements after July 23, 1995, under (a), (b), and/or (c) of this subsection
or subsection (4)(a), (b), and/or (c) of this section, or both, all firearm
enhancements under this subsection shall be twice the amount of the enhancement
listed.

(e) Notwithstanding any
other provision of law, all firearm enhancements under this section are
mandatory, shall be served in total confinement, and shall run consecutively to
all other sentencing provisions, including other firearm or deadly weapon
enhancements, for all offenses sentenced under this chapter. However, whether
or not a mandatory minimum term has expired, an offender serving a sentence
under this subsection may be granted an extraordinary medical placement when
authorized under RCW 9.94A.728(4).

(f) The firearm
enhancements in this section shall apply to all felony crimes except the
following: Possession of a machine gun, possessing a stolen firearm, drive-by
shooting, theft of a firearm, unlawful possession of a firearm in the first and
second degree, and use of a machine gun in a felony.

(g) If the standard
sentence range under this section exceeds the statutory maximum sentence for
the offense, the statutory maximum sentence shall be the presumptive sentence
unless the offender is a persistent offender. If the addition of a firearm
enhancement increases the sentence so that it would exceed the statutory
maximum for the offense, the portion of the sentence representing the
enhancement may not be reduced.

(4) The following
additional times shall be added to the standard sentence range for felony
crimes committed after July 23, 1995, if the offender or an accomplice was
armed with a deadly weapon other than a firearm as defined in RCW 9.41.010 and
the offender is being sentenced for one of the crimes listed in this subsection
as eligible for any deadly weapon enhancements based on the classification of
the completed felony crime. If the offender is being sentenced for more than
one offense, the deadly weapon enhancement or enhancements must be added to the
total period of confinement for all offenses, regardless of which underlying
offense is subject to a deadly weapon enhancement. If the offender or an
accomplice was armed with a deadly weapon other than a firearm as defined in
RCW 9.41.010 and the offender is being sentenced for an anticipatory offense
under chapter 9A.28 RCW to commit one of the crimes listed in this subsection
as eligible for any deadly weapon enhancements, the following additional times
shall be added to the standard sentence range determined under subsection (2)
of this section based on the felony crime of conviction as classified under RCW
9A.28.020:

(a) Two years for any
felony defined under any law as a class A felony or with a statutory maximum
sentence of at least twenty years, or both, and not covered under (f) of this
subsection.

(b) One year for any felony
defined under any law as a class B felony or with a statutory maximum sentence
of ten years, or both, and not covered under (f) of this subsection.

(c) Six months for any
felony defined under any law as a class C felony or with a statutory maximum sentence
of five years, or both, and not covered under (f) of this subsection.

(d) If the offender is
being sentenced under (a), (b), and/or (c) of this subsection for any deadly
weapon enhancements and the offender has previously been sentenced for any deadly
weapon enhancements after July 23, 1995, under (a), (b), and/or (c) of this
subsection or subsection (3)(a), (b), and/or (c) of this section, or both, all
deadly weapon enhancements under this subsection shall be twice the amount of
the enhancement listed.

(e) Notwithstanding any
other provision of law, all deadly weapon enhancements under this section are
mandatory, shall be served in total confinement, and shall run consecutively to
all other sentencing provisions, including other firearm or deadly weapon
enhancements, for all offenses sentenced under this chapter. However, whether
or not a mandatory minimum term has expired, an offender serving a sentence
under this subsection may be granted an extraordinary medical placement when
authorized under RCW 9.94A.728(4).

(f) The deadly weapon
enhancements in this section shall apply to all felony crimes except the
following: Possession of a machine gun, possessing a stolen firearm, drive-by
shooting, theft of a firearm, unlawful possession of a firearm in the first and
second degree, and use of a machine gun in a felony.

(g) If the standard
sentence range under this section exceeds the statutory maximum sentence for
the offense, the statutory maximum sentence shall be the presumptive sentence
unless the offender is a persistent offender. If the addition of a deadly
weapon enhancement increases the sentence so that it would exceed the statutory
maximum for the offense, the portion of the sentence representing the
enhancement may not be reduced.

(5) The following
additional times shall be added to the standard sentence range if the offender
or an accomplice committed the offense while in a county jail or state
correctional facility and the offender is being sentenced for one of the crimes
listed in this subsection. If the offender or an accomplice committed one of
the crimes listed in this subsection while in a county jail or state
correctional facility, and the offender is being sentenced for an anticipatory
offense under chapter 9A.28 RCW to commit one of the crimes listed in this
subsection, the following additional times shall be added to the standard
sentence range determined under subsection (2) of this section:

(a) Eighteen months for
offenses committed under RCW 69.50.401(a)(1) (i) or (ii) or 69.50.410;

(b) Fifteen months for
offenses committed under RCW 69.50.401(a)(1) (iii), (iv), and (v);

(c) Twelve months for
offenses committed under RCW 69.50.401(d).

For the purposes of
this subsection, all of the real property of a state correctional facility or
county jail shall be deemed to be part of that facility or county jail.

(6) An additional
twenty-four months shall be added to the standard sentence range for any ranked
offense involving a violation of chapter 69.50 RCW if the offense was also a
violation of RCW 69.50.435 or 9.94A.605.

(7) An additional two
years shall be added to the standard sentence range for vehicular homicide
committed while under the influence of intoxicating liquor or any drug as
defined by RCW 46.61.502 for each prior offense as defined in RCW 46.61.5055.

(8) An additional
one to three years shall be added to the presumptive sentence for any felony
offense committed for the benefit of, at the direction of, or in association
with a criminal street gang, with the intent to promote, further, or assist in
criminal conduct by gang members, as provided in section 2 of this act.

Sec. 5. RCW 13.40.160 and 1999 c
91 s 2 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) The standard range
disposition for a juvenile adjudicated of an offense is determined according to
RCW 13.40.0357.

(a) When the court
sentences an offender to a local sanction as provided in RCW 13.40.0357 option
A, the court shall impose a determinate disposition within the standard ranges,
except as provided in subsections (2), (3), and (4) of this section. The
disposition may be comprised of one or more local sanctions.

(b) When the court
sentences an offender to a standard range as provided in RCW 13.40.0357 option
A that includes a term of confinement exceeding thirty days, commitment shall
be to the department for the standard range of confinement, except as provided
in subsections (2), (3), and (4) of this section.

(2) If the court
concludes, and enters reasons for its conclusion, that disposition within the
standard range would effectuate a manifest injustice the court shall impose a
disposition outside the standard range, as indicated in option C of RCW
13.40.0357. The court's finding of manifest injustice shall be supported by
clear and convincing evidence.

A disposition outside
the standard range shall be determinate and shall be comprised of confinement
or community supervision, or a combination thereof. When a judge finds a
manifest injustice and imposes a sentence of confinement exceeding thirty days,
the court shall sentence the juvenile to a maximum term, and the provisions of
RCW 13.40.030(2) shall be used to determine the range. A disposition outside
the standard range is appealable under RCW 13.40.230 by the state or the
respondent. A disposition within the standard range is not appealable under
RCW 13.40.230.

(3) When a juvenile
offender is found to have committed a sex offense, other than a sex offense
that is also a serious violent offense as defined by RCW 9.94A.030, and has no
history of a prior sex offense, the court, on its own motion or the motion of
the state or the respondent, may order an examination to determine whether the respondent
is amenable to treatment.

The report of the
examination shall include at a minimum the following: The respondent's version
of the facts and the official version of the facts, the respondent's offense
history, an assessment of problems in addition to alleged deviant behaviors,
the respondent's social, educational, and employment situation, and other
evaluation measures used. The report shall set forth the sources of the
evaluator's information.

The examiner shall
assess and report regarding the respondent's amenability to treatment and
relative risk to the community. A proposed treatment plan shall be provided
and shall include, at a minimum:

(a)(i) Frequency and
type of contact between the offender and therapist;

(ii) Specific issues to
be addressed in the treatment and description of planned treatment modalities;

(iii) Monitoring plans,
including any requirements regarding living conditions, lifestyle requirements,
and monitoring by family members, legal guardians, or others;

(iv) Anticipated length
of treatment; and

(v) Recommended
crime-related prohibitions.

The court on its own
motion may order, or on a motion by the state shall order, a second examination
regarding the offender's amenability to treatment. The evaluator shall be
selected by the party making the motion. The defendant shall pay the cost of any
second examination ordered unless the court finds the defendant to be indigent
in which case the state shall pay the cost.

After receipt of
reports of the examination, the court shall then consider whether the offender
and the community will benefit from use of this special sex offender
disposition alternative and consider the victim's opinion whether the offender
should receive a treatment disposition under this section. If the court
determines that this special sex offender disposition alternative is appropriate,
then the court shall impose a determinate disposition within the standard range
for the offense, or if the court concludes, and enters reasons for its
conclusions, that such disposition would cause a manifest injustice, the court
shall impose a disposition under option C, and the court may suspend the
execution of the disposition and place the offender on community supervision
for at least two years. As a condition of the suspended disposition, the court
may impose the conditions of community supervision and other conditions,
including up to thirty days of confinement and requirements that the offender
do any one or more of the following:

(b)(i) Devote time to a
specific education, employment, or occupation;

(ii) Undergo available
outpatient sex offender treatment for up to two years, or inpatient sex
offender treatment not to exceed the standard range of confinement for that
offense. A community mental health center may not be used for such treatment
unless it has an appropriate program designed for sex offender treatment. The
respondent shall not change sex offender treatment providers or treatment
conditions without first notifying the prosecutor, the probation counselor, and
the court, and shall not change providers without court approval after a
hearing if the prosecutor or probation counselor object to the change;

(iii) Remain within
prescribed geographical boundaries and notify the court or the probation
counselor prior to any change in the offender's address, educational program,
or employment;

(iv) Report to the
prosecutor and the probation counselor prior to any change in a sex offender
treatment provider. This change shall have prior approval by the court;

(v) Report as directed
to the court and a probation counselor;

(vi) Pay all
court-ordered legal financial obligations, perform community service, or any
combination thereof;

(vii) Make restitution
to the victim for the cost of any counseling reasonably related to the offense;

(viii) Comply with the
conditions of any court-ordered probation bond; or

(ix) The court shall
order that the offender may not attend the public or approved private
elementary, middle, or high school attended by the victim or the victim's
siblings. The parents or legal guardians of the offender are responsible for
transportation or other costs associated with the offender's change of school
that would otherwise be paid by the school district. The court shall send
notice of the disposition and restriction on attending the same school as the
victim or victim's siblings to the public or approved private school the
juvenile will attend, if known, or if unknown, to the approved private schools
and the public school district board of directors of the district in which the
juvenile resides or intends to reside. This notice must be sent at the
earliest possible date but not later than ten calendar days after entry of the
disposition.

The sex offender
treatment provider shall submit quarterly reports on the respondent's progress
in treatment to the court and the parties. The reports shall reference the
treatment plan and include at a minimum the following: Dates of attendance,
respondent's compliance with requirements, treatment activities, the
respondent's relative progress in treatment, and any other material specified
by the court at the time of the disposition.

At the time of the
disposition, the court may set treatment review hearings as the court considers
appropriate.

Except as provided in
this subsection (3), after July 1, 1991, examinations and treatment ordered
pursuant to this subsection shall only be conducted by sex offender treatment
providers certified by the department of health pursuant to chapter 18.155
RCW. A sex offender therapist who examines or treats a juvenile sex offender
pursuant to this subsection does not have to be certified by the department of
health pursuant to chapter 18.155 RCW if the court finds that: (A) The
offender has already moved to another state or plans to move to another state
for reasons other than circumventing the certification requirements; (B) no
certified providers are available for treatment within a reasonable
geographical distance of the offender's home; and (C) the evaluation and
treatment plan comply with this subsection (((4) [(3)])) (3) and
the rules adopted by the department of health.

If the offender
violates any condition of the disposition or the court finds that the
respondent is failing to make satisfactory progress in treatment, the court may
revoke the suspension and order execution of the disposition or the court may
impose a penalty of up to thirty days' confinement for violating conditions of
the disposition. The court may order both execution of the disposition and up
to thirty days' confinement for the violation of the conditions of the disposition.
The court shall give credit for any confinement time previously served if that
confinement was for the offense for which the suspension is being revoked.

For purposes of this
section, "victim" means any person who has sustained emotional,
psychological, physical, or financial injury to person or property as a direct
result of the crime charged. "Victim" may also include a known
parent or guardian of a victim who is a minor child unless the parent or
guardian is the perpetrator of the offense.

A disposition entered
under this subsection (3) is not appealable under RCW 13.40.230.

(4) If the juvenile
offender is subject to a standard range disposition of local sanctions or 15 to
36 weeks of confinement and has not committed an A- or B+ offense, the court
may impose the disposition alternative under RCW 13.40.165.

(5) RCW 13.40.193 shall
govern the disposition of any juvenile adjudicated of possessing a firearm in
violation of RCW 9.41.040(1)(b)(iii) or any crime in which a special finding is
entered that the juvenile was armed with a firearm.

(6) Section 3 of
this act governs the disposition of any juvenile adjudicated of a felony
offense committed for the benefit of, at the direction of, or in association
with a criminal street gang, with the intent of promoting, furthering, or
assisting in criminal conduct by gang members.

(7) Whenever a
juvenile offender is entitled to credit for time spent in detention prior to a
dispositional order, the dispositional order shall specifically state the
number of days of credit for time served.

(((7))) (8)
Except as provided under subsection (3) or (4) of this section or RCW
13.40.127, the court shall not suspend or defer the imposition or the execution
of the disposition.

(((8)))
(9) In no case shall the term of confinement imposed by the court at
disposition exceed that to which an adult could be subjected for the same
offense.

---
END ---