BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF
WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec.
1. The legislature finds
that the population of certain pods of orca whales had peaked at ninety-nine in
1995, but since that time the number of these whales has dropped to
seventy-eight in 2001. Monitoring the status and the dynamics affecting these
whales is important because as top predators within their environment, they act
as an important indicator of the health of prey species such as salmon. The
legislature finds that the creation of an orca whale emblem that will affix to
a vehicle license plate will appeal to citizens interested in supporting orca
whale research.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
2. A new section is added
to chapter 46.16 RCW to read as follows:

(1) Any person may
purchase an orca whale research emblem for display on vehicle license plates in
the manner described by the department. The emblems shall be designed to be affixed
to a vehicle license number plate by pressure-sensitive adhesive so as not to
obscure the plate identification numbers or letters. The department, after
consulting with the Washington state patrol, shall determine whether the
emblems use fully reflectorized materials designed to provide visibility at
night.

(2) The whale museum
located in Friday Harbor, Washington, shall select the design of the orca whale
research emblem.

(3) The director shall
adopt fees to be charged by the department for emblems issued by the department
under this section. The department shall seek to establish agreements with
businesses and nonprofit organizations to conduct the sales of orca whale research
emblems. All sales by the department shall be in bulk to businesses and
nonprofit organizations for subsequent sale to the general public. The fee for
each orca whale research emblem issued under this section shall be in an amount
sufficient to offset the costs of production of the emblems and the
administration of that program by the department, and to cover the costs
incurred by the department of fish and wildlife to administer the grant program
established in section 3 of this act, not to exceed a total fee of twenty-five
dollars per emblem. The director may adopt rules to implement this section,
including the setting of fees.

(4) The orca whale
research account is created in the custody of the state treasurer. All
receipts by the department from the issuance of orca whale research emblems
under this section shall be deposited into this account. Expenditures from the
account may be used only for the costs of production of orca whale research
emblems and administration of the program by the department of licensing, with
the balance used only by the department of fish and wildlife for orca whale
research in accordance with section 3 of this act. Only the director of
licensing, the director of the department of fish and wildlife, or their designees
may authorize expenditures from the account. The account is subject to
allotment procedures under chapter 43.88 RCW, but no appropriation is required
for expenditures.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
3. A new section is added
to chapter 43.300 RCW to read as follows:

The
department shall administer a grant program for orca whale research by
Washington state researchers for J-K-L whalepods in the Salish sea. Funding
for the program shall come from sales of orca whale research emblems pursuant
to section 2 of this act. The department must award research grants under this
section through a competitive request-for-proposal process. The department
shall develop and adopt policies to establish an application process for the
grants, criteria to evaluate the applications, and to monitor the activities of
grant recipients. The department may adopt rules necessary to implement the
grant program established in this section.

---
END ---