BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF
WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec.
1. Since September 11, 2001,
Americans have come to understand that challenges to airport security require
responsible employers and a high-quality, stable airport work force. High
turnover and irresponsible actions by contractors have only partially been
addressed by federal legislation.

The legislature finds
that homeland security, as well as the safety and security of passengers and
employees at large airports could be compromised by high turnover rates among
airport workers, and by the presence of contractors and tenants at large
airports who do not observe minimum standards of legal and ethical behavior.
The legislature further finds that the 2001 federal aviation and transportation
security act addressed this problem for airport security screening contractors
and personnel only, and does not sufficiently protect Washington state citizens
and visitors. Workers throughout the airport have job responsibilities that
affect aircraft security, and all airport employees need to be alert and
committed to airport safety. All businesses operating at large airports should
have satisfactory records of legal compliance and business integrity.

The legislature finds
that it is important, for the millions of passengers and thousands of employees
at Sea-Tac airport, to protect against high job turnover, and to provide
conditions that encourage a stable, well-trained work force, and responsibility
on the part of contractors and others doing business with large airports such
as Sea-Tac airport. The legislature further finds that the economic well-being
of Sea-Tac has an impact on the economic health of Washington state as a whole.

The legislature intends
to mandate that port districts operating large airports have the responsibility
and the statutory authority to enhance security through the enforcement and
adoption of minimum standards of employment, and standards of business
responsibility for lessees, tenants, and contractors.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
2. A new section is added
to chapter 53.08 RCW to read as follows:

A port district with a
population of one million or more operating an airport serving more than twenty
scheduled jet aircraft flights per day must undertake a program to reduce work
force turnover, and establish high employment standards among all businesses
operating at the airport.

(1) The port district
may formulate minimum labor standards applicable to lessees, tenants,
sublessees, service contractors, and subcontractors of any properties or facilities
owned or operated by it.

(2) The port district
must monitor, on an ongoing basis, employment conditions, employee training,
and worker retention rates among all businesses operating at the airport.
Employers with businesses at the airport will provide the port district, upon
request, with full access to all employment records, as a condition of doing
business at the airport.

(3) The port district
will evaluate the impact on airport work force stability of all current and
prospective decisions regarding leasing, tenancy or contracting at the airport,
and must incorporate turnover mitigation measures into all such decisions
insofar as possible. For each decision on leasing, tenancy, and contracting at
the airport, the port must issue a written finding on the decision's probable
effect on airport work force turnover.

(4) At least twice each
year, beginning within one hundred twenty days from the effective date of this
act, the port district must issue a public report on employment conditions and work
force turnover at the airport. The report will include, at a minimum, a
comprehensive summary of the information from subsection (2) of this section on
employment conditions and turnover rates among all private employers at the
airport, and the written findings from subsection (3) of this section. No more
than thirty days after issuing the report, the port must hold a public hearing
on employment conditions and work force turnover at the airport.

(5) The port district
must develop a comprehensive plan for promotion of employment stability in all
sectors of the airport work force. The plan must address all aspects of
airport work force stabilization, including recruitment, training, security
training, employment standards, and performance standards. The port district
will include a preliminary plan in the second report on employment conditions
and work force turnover at the airport. At least thirty, and no more than
forty-five days after the first public hearing following issuance of the
preliminary plan, the port district must approve a final version of the plan,
also in public session. The plan must be updated on an annual basis following
the procedure and schedule outlined in this subsection.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
3. A new section is added
to chapter 53.08 RCW to read as follows:

A port district with a
population of one million or more operating an airport serving more than twenty
scheduled jet aircraft flights per day must ensure that contractors and tenants
operating businesses at the airport have a satisfactory record of compliance
with applicable statutes and rules and a satisfactory record of business
integrity.

(1) Before entering
into any lease or a service contract for services to be performed at an
airport, the port district must certify that the prospective lessee or
contractor has the necessary ability and business integrity to justify allowing
the lessee or contractor to do business at the airport. Factors that must be
considered in making this determination are: (a) Financial resources; (b)
technical qualifications; (c) experience; (d) organization, material,
equipment, facilities, and expertise necessary to carry out the work; (e) a
satisfactory record of performance; (f) a satisfactory record of compliance
with applicable statutes and rules, federal, state, and local laws regarding
health and safety, environmental laws, labor and employment laws, and licensing
laws; and (g) a satisfactory record of business integrity.

(2) The port district
must require lessees and service contractors to seek certification from the
port according to the procedures outlined in subsection (1) of this section
before entering into a sublease, service contract, or subcontract for services
to be performed at the airport. Such certification is required before lessees
or service contractors enter into any agreement to amend, modify, or extend any
existing sublease, service contract, or subcontract.

(3) The port district
must require every prospective lessee, sublessee, service contractor, or
subcontractor for services to be performed at the airport to complete and
submit a questionnaire developed by the port that will provide the information
the port needs to determine whether the lessee, sublessee, or contractor meets
the standards set forth in subsection (1) of this section, and the probable
effect of its operations on the airport's comprehensive plan for promotion of
employment stability, described in section 2 of this act. A prospective
lessee, sublessee, contractor, or subcontractor must submit the questionnaire
even if no bid is required. The lessee, sublessee, contractor, or
subcontractor must submit its response to the questionnaire under penalty of
perjury, and must disclose any finding including a preliminary finding subject
to appeal by a government agency or court of competent jurisdiction that it has
not complied with an applicable federal, state, or local law in any location in
which it operates. The lessee, sublessee, contractor, or subcontractor must
update its responses to the questionnaire during the term of the sublease or
contract within thirty days after any material change to the responses
previously provided. The port may revoke the lessee's, sublessee's,
contractor's, or subcontractor's certification for failure to update the
questionnaire.

(4) A prospective
lessee, sublessee, service contractor, or subcontractor must submit the
questionnaire no fewer than fourteen calendar days before execution of the
sublease or contract in order to allow full review of the questionnaire.
Questionnaires are public records as defined in RCW 42.17.020. Within one
business day of receiving a request for any questionnaires, the port district
must provide the questionnaires to the requestor.

(5) Based upon review
of the information contained in the questionnaire, information obtained from
other governmental agencies, information received from the public, and on its
own independent investigation the port district must either certify the lessee,
sublessee, contractor, or subcontractor or make a determination of
nonresponsibility. Before being declared nonresponsible, a prospective lessee,
sublessee, contractor, or subcontractor must be notified of the proposed
determination, provided with a summary of the information upon which the port
is relying, and given an opportunity to be heard. At the responsibility
hearing, the prospective lessee, sublessee, contractor, or subcontractor is
allowed to rebut adverse information and to present evidence that it has the
necessary quality, fitness, capacity, and integrity. The prospective lessee,
sublessee, contractor, or subcontractor must request a hearing within five
calendar days after the port provides notice of its preliminary determination.
Failure to submit a written request for a hearing within the five-day period
waives the right to such a hearing.

(6) Lessees and service
contractors may not enter into any sublease or service contract for services to
be performed at the airport, or amend, modify, or extend any existing sublease
or service contract unless the prospective sublessee, contractor, or
subcontractor has been certified by the port district in accordance with this
section.

(7) Any lessee,
sublessee, contractor, or subcontractor performing services at the airport must
comply with all applicable federal, state, and local laws in the performance of
the contract, including but not limited to laws regarding health and safety,
environmental laws, labor and employment laws, and licensing laws. Lessees and
contractors must incorporate all the provisions of this section in any sublease
or covered subcontract.

(8) Lessees, service
contractors, their sublessees, and covered subcontractors must notify the port
district within fourteen days upon receiving notification that a government
agency has initiated an investigation of the lessee, sublessee, contractor, or
subcontractor which may result in a finding that the lessee, sublessee,
contractor, or subcontractor is not in compliance with subsection (1) of this
section.

(9) Lessees,
contractors, sublessees, and covered subcontractors must notify the port
district within fourteen days upon receiving any finding, including a
preliminary finding subject to appeal, by a government agency or court of
competent jurisdiction that lessees, contractors, sublessees, or subcontractors
have not complied with an applicable federal, state, or local law.

(10) Upon award of any
lease, sublease, contract, or subcontract, the lessee, sublessee, contractor,
or subcontractor must complete a pledge of compliance attesting under penalty
of perjury to compliance with subsection (1) of this section. Lessees and
contractors must ensure that their sublessees and subcontractors are in
compliance with this section.

(11) Where the port
district has received information indicating that a lessee, contractor, or one
of its subcontractors or sublessees is not in compliance with this section, the
port district must issue a written notice to the lessee or contractor regarding
the alleged noncompliance, and it must provide the lessee or contractor with
ten days to demonstrate either that there was no violation, or that the
violation has been cured. In the event that the employer has not demonstrated
to the port district within such period that it has cured such violation, the
port district may then declare a material breach of the service contract,
except where such violation involves a failure to comply with the provisions of
federal labor laws (the national labor relations act or the railway labor
act). Where the violation involves a failure to comply with federal labor law,
the port district may hold a public hearing regarding the nature and extent of the
violation, and whether the violation implicates the proprietary interests of
the port district. In the event the port district determines that such
violation does implicate its proprietary interests, it may seek an appropriate
remedy.

(12) If, after issuing
the certification, the port district determines that the lessee, sublessee,
contractor, or subcontractor has provided false information, the port may
revoke the certification.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
4. A new section is added
to chapter 42.17 RCW to read as follows:

Questionnaires
submitted under section 3 of this act are not subject to RCW 42.17.320.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 5. This act is necessary for
the immediate preservation of the public peace, health, or safety, or support
of the state government and its existing public institutions, and takes effect
immediately.

---
END ---