BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF
WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1. RCW 84.08.130 and 1998 c
54 s 3 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) Any taxpayer or
taxing unit feeling aggrieved by the action of any county board of equalization
may appeal to the board of tax appeals by filing with the board of tax appeals
in accordance with RCW 1.12.070 a notice of appeal within ((thirty)) ninety
days after the mailing of the decision of such board of equalization, unless
this period is waived or extended for good cause shown, which notice shall
specify the actions complained of; and in like manner any county assessor may
appeal to the board of tax appeals from any action of any county board of
equalization. There shall be no fee charged for the filing of an appeal. The
board shall transmit a copy of the notice of appeal to all named parties within
thirty days of its receipt by the board. Appeals which are not filed as
provided in this section shall be dismissed. The board of tax appeals shall
require the board appealed from to file a true and correct copy of its decision
in such action and all evidence taken in connection therewith, and may receive
further evidence, and shall make such order as in its judgment is just and
proper.

(2) The board of tax
appeals may enter an order, pursuant to subsection (1) of this section, that
has effect up to the end of the assessment cycle used by the assessor, if there
has been no intervening change in the value during that time.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
2. A new section is added
to chapter 82.03 RCW to read as follows:

The board
shall issue initial or final orders from appeals of a county board of
equalization action under RCW 84.08.130 within ninety days after conclusion of
the hearing or after submission of all memorandums, briefs, additional
evidence, or proposed findings unless this ninety-day period is waived or
extended for good cause shown. Initial or final orders that are not served in
writing as provided in this section shall result in a judgment for the
taxpayer.

---
END ---