BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF
WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec.
1. A new section is added
to chapter 79.90 RCW to read as follows:

State-owned
aquatic lands that abut mineral resource lands designated by a city or county
under chapter 36.70A RCW may not be withdrawn from conflicting uses or leasing
under RCW 79.68.060 or 79.90.460(3).

--- END ---