BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF
WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec.
1. The legislature finds
that:

(1) The Washington
economy of the future can provide unparalleled opportunity while maintaining
Washington's traditional values if this state pursues the future with clarity
of purpose and perseverance.

(2) The Washington economy
is in the midst of a massive transition created by technological changes,
global competition, and new production practices.

(3) In order to
maintain employment opportunities, increase income levels, reduce poverty, and
generate the public revenues needed to provide public services, Washington must
increasingly rely on an economy that adds value to its natural resources and
provides a diverse mix of products.

(4) A Washington
progress board is needed to:

(a) Encourage the
discussion and understanding of critical global and national economic trends
that will affect the Washington economy in the coming decades;

(b) Formulate and
submit to Washingtonians a strategy that describes and explains a vision for
Washington's economic progress over the next twenty to thirty years; and

(c) Submit to the
legislature, for enactment, goals for Washington's progress, including
measurable indicators of the achievement of those goals, as provided for in
section 2 of this act.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
2. A new section is added
to chapter 43.330 RCW to read as follows:

(1) The Washington
progress board is created, consisting of the governor, nine members appointed
by the governor, and the director of the department of general administration,
who shall be a nonvoting ex officio member.

(2)(a) Of the initial
appointed members, four shall serve for terms ending January 31, 2004, and five
shall serve for terms ending January 31, 2006. Except for initial
appointments, the terms of appointed members shall be four years. Members may
be reappointed.

(b)(i) Members of the
board shall be representative of the ethnic, cultural, social, and economic
diversity of the people of Washington.

(ii) Five of the
appointed members of the board shall be residents of different congressional
districts in the state.

(c) Members of the
board are entitled to travel expenses in accordance with RCW 43.03.050 and
43.03.060.

(3) The governor shall
serve as chair of the board and may appoint an executive officer for the board
for a term and with such duties and powers as the board determines to be
necessary or appropriate.

(4) A majority of the
members of the board constitutes a quorum for the transaction of business.

(5) The board shall
meet together as a board as the board determines necessary at times and places
specified by call of the chair or a majority of the members of the board.

(6) The department of
community, trade, and economic development, office of community development,
shall provide clerical, technical, and management personnel to the board to
serve as the board's staff.

(7)(a) The board shall
develop a strategy that addresses the economic, social, cultural,
environmental, and other needs and aspirations of the people of Washington.
The strategy shall address issues that the board determines are necessary and
appropriate to Washington's future. Such issues shall include:

(i) Education and work
force;

(ii) Public and private
cooperation;

(iii) Environmental
quality;

(iv) Infrastructure;

(v) Funding and
taxation;

(vi) Organizational
excellence; and

(vii) Such other issues
as the board, by majority vote, adds to the strategy.

(b) When developing the
strategy, the board shall hold public hearings, public meetings, and workshops
as needed to ensure the participation of a broad cross section of Washington's
population. The board shall publicize the public hearings, public meetings,
and workshops in each city in which they are held and shall allow interested
residents and other individuals to appear and be heard by the board.

(c) After considering
any written comments and public testimony relating to the proposed strategy,
the board shall revise the strategy as it considers necessary or appropriate.
The board, by a vote of a majority of its members, shall approve and adopt a
final strategy. The board shall submit, in addition to its adopted strategy, a
summary and digest of comments and public testimony and its response, if any,
to those comments. The adopted strategy shall be submitted to the legislature
not later than December 1, 2008, and every six years thereafter.

(8) As a part of the
strategy adopted under subsection (7) of this section, the board shall also
adopt a recommended implementation plan. The plan shall include
recommendations for statutory or other changes the board considers appropriate,
modifications in public fiscal and spending policies, including the allocation
of lottery revenues, and also recommendations for implementing actions to be
carried out by local governments, businesses, private citizens, and other
organizations.

(9)(a) The board shall,
in its adopted strategy, include a series of goals for Washington's progress
over the next two to three decades.

(b) Goals shall include
such measurable indicators of attainment, as the board shall determine, that
show the extent to which each goal is being achieved.

(c) Goals shall be
reviewed by the legislature, which may propose legislation that enacts the
goals as recommended or that modifies, deletes, or adds to the goals. Any
goals enacted by the legislature shall become the goals used by the board in
its subsequent activities.

(d) After enactment,
the board may recommend to the legislature such modifications to the goals as
it considers appropriate.

(10) The board shall
prepare, at least once each biennium, a report that describes progress toward
achievement of the board's strategy, based on the specific indicators the board
adopts for measuring the attainment of strategic goals. The report shall
include an analysis of issues and trends of strategic significance and shall
propose an agenda that identifies key steps that Washington should take over
the following two years to build for Washington's future. In developing the
report required by this section, the board shall consider the criteria in this
section.

(11) The
board may adopt rules in accordance with chapter 34.05 RCW.

---
END ---