BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF
WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1. RCW 64.38.020 and 1995 c
283 s 4 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) Unless
otherwise provided in the governing documents, an association may:

(((1))) (a)
Adopt and amend bylaws, rules, and regulations;

(((2))) (b)
Adopt and amend budgets for revenues, expenditures, and reserves, and impose
and collect assessments for common expenses from owners;

(((3))) (c)
Hire and discharge or contract with managing agents and other employees,
agents, and independent contractors;

(((4))) (d)
Institute, defend, or intervene in litigation or administrative proceedings in
its own name on behalf of itself or two or more owners on matters affecting the
homeowners' association, but not on behalf of owners involved in disputes that
are not the responsibility of the association;

(((5))) (e)
Make contracts and incur liabilities;

(((6))) (f)
Regulate the use, maintenance, repair, replacement, and modification of common
areas;

(((7))) (g)
Cause additional improvements to be made as a part of the common areas;

(((8))) (h)
Acquire, hold, encumber, and convey in its own name any right, title, or
interest to real or personal property;

(((9))) (i)
Grant easements, leases, licenses, and concessions through or over the common
areas and petition for or consent to the vacation of streets and alleys;

(((10))) (j)
Impose and collect any payments, fees, or charges for the use, rental, or
operation of the common areas;

(((11))) (k)
Impose and collect charges for late payments of assessments and, after notice
and an opportunity to be heard by the board of directors or by the
representative designated by the board of directors and in accordance with the
procedures as provided in the bylaws or rules and regulations adopted by the
board of directors, levy reasonable fines in accordance with a previously
established schedule adopted by the board of directors and furnished to the
owners for violation of the bylaws, rules, and regulations of the association;

(((12))) (l)
Exercise any other powers conferred by the bylaws;

(((13))) (m)
Exercise all other powers that may be exercised in this state by the same type
of corporation as the association; and

(((14))) (n)
Exercise any other powers necessary and proper for the governance and operation
of the association.

(2) An
association may not prohibit an owner of residential real property contiguous
to a pool, lake, or waterway from erecting a temporary fence or barrier, the
construction and design of which may be subject to approval by the board of
directors, to ensure the safety of young children.

--- END ---