BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF
WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1. RCW 19.27.060 and 1989 c
266 s 2 and 1989 c 246 s 1 are each reenacted and amended to read as follows:

(1) The governing
bodies of counties and cities may amend the codes enumerated in RCW 19.27.031
as amended and adopted by the state building code council as they apply within
their respective jurisdictions, but the amendments shall not result in a code that
is less than the minimum performance standards and objectives contained in the
state building code.

(a) No amendment to a
code enumerated in RCW 19.27.031 as amended and adopted by the state building
code council that affects single family or multifamily residential buildings
shall be effective unless the amendment is approved by the building code
council under RCW 19.27.074(1)(b).

(b) Any county or city
amendment to a code enumerated in RCW 19.27.031 which is approved under RCW
19.27.074(1)(b) shall continue to be effective after any action is taken under
RCW 19.27.074(1)(a) without necessity of reapproval under RCW 19.27.074(1)(b)
unless the amendment is declared null and void by the council at the time any
action is taken under RCW 19.27.074(1)(a) because such action in any way
altered the impact of the amendment.

(2) Except as permitted
or provided otherwise under this section, the state building code shall be
applicable to all buildings and structures including those owned by the state
or by any governmental subdivision or unit of local government.

(3) The governing body
of each county or city may limit the application of any portion of the state
building code to exclude specified classes or types of buildings or structures
according to use other than single family or multifamily residential
buildings((: PROVIDED, That)). However, in no event shall
fruits or vegetables of the tree or vine stored in buildings or warehouses
constitute combustible stock for the purposes of application of the uniform fire
code. A governing body of a county or city may inspect facilities used for
temporary storage and processing of agricultural commodities.

(4) The provisions of
this chapter shall not apply to any building four or more stories high with a B
occupancy as defined by the uniform building code, 1982 edition, and with a
city fire insurance rating of 1, 2, or 3 as defined by a recognized fire rating
bureau or organization.

(5) No provision of the
uniform fire code concerning roadways shall be part of the state building
code: PROVIDED, That this subsection shall not limit the authority of a county
or city to adopt street, road, or access standards.

(6) The provisions of
the state building code may be preempted by any city or county to the extent
that the code provisions relating to the installation or use of sprinklers in
jail cells conflict with the secure and humane operation of jails.

(7)(a) Effective one
year after July 23, 1989, the governing bodies of counties and cities may adopt
an ordinance or resolution to exempt from permit requirements certain
construction or alteration of either group R, division 3, or group M, division
1 occupancies, or both, as defined in the uniform building code, 1988 edition,
for which the total cost of fair market value of the construction or alteration
does not exceed fifteen hundred dollars. The permit exemption shall not
otherwise exempt the construction or alteration from the substantive standards
of the codes enumerated in RCW 19.27.031, as amended and maintained by the
state building code council under RCW 19.27.070.

(b) Prior
to July 23, 1989, the state building code council shall adopt by rule,
guidelines exempting from permit requirements certain construction and
alteration activities under (a) of this subsection.

--- END ---