BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF
WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1. RCW 28B.95.150 and 2001
c 184 s 2 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) The committee may
establish a college savings program. If such a program is established, the
college savings program shall be established, in such form as may be determined
by the committee, to be a qualified state tuition program as defined by the internal
revenue service under section 529 of the internal revenue code, and shall be
administered in a manner consistent with the Washington advanced college
tuition payment program. The committee, in planning and devising the program,
shall consult with the state investment board, the state treasurer, a qualified
actuarial consulting firm with appropriate expertise to evaluate such plans,
the legislative fiscal and higher education committees, and the institutions of
higher education.

(2) ((Up to two hundred
thousand dollars of administrative fees collected from guaranteed education
tuition program participants may be applied as a loan to fund the development
of a college savings program. This loan must be repaid with interest before
the conclusion of the biennium in which the committee draws funds for this
purpose from the advanced college tuition payment program account.

(3))) If such a college savings program is
established, the college savings program account is created in the custody of
the state treasurer for the purpose of administering the college savings
program. If created, the account shall be a discrete nontreasury account in
the custody of the state treasurer. Interest earnings shall be retained in
accordance with RCW 43.79A.040. Disbursements from the account, except for
program administration, are exempt from appropriations and the allotment
provisions of chapter 43.88 RCW. Money used for program administration is
subject to the allotment provisions, but without appropriation.

(((4))) (3)
The committee, after consultation with the state investment board, shall
determine the investment policies for the college savings program. Program
contributions may be invested by the state investment board or the committee
may contract with an investment company licensed to conduct business in this
state to do the investing. The committee shall keep or cause to be kept full
and adequate accounts and records of the assets of each individual participant
in the college savings program.

(((5))) (4)
Neither the state nor any eligible educational institution may be considered or
held to be an insurer of the funds or assets of the individual participant
accounts in the college savings program created under this section nor may any
such entity be held liable for any shortage of funds in the event that balances
in the individual participant accounts are insufficient to meet the educational
expenses of the institution chosen by the student for which the individual
participant account was intended.

(((6))) (5)
The committee shall adopt rules to implement this section. Such rules shall
include but not be limited to administration, investment management, promotion,
and marketing; compliance with internal revenue service standards; application
procedures and fees; start-up costs; loans; phasing in the savings
program and withdrawals therefrom; deterrents to early withdrawals and
provisions for hardship withdrawals; and reenrollment in the savings program
after withdrawal. At the discretion of the committee, funds not to exceed
five hundred thousand dollars from the advanced college tuition payment program
account may be applied as a loan to fund the start-up of a college savings
program. Funds borrowed are to be repaid, including interest as established by
the committee, during a time period determined by the committee but not to
exceed four years from the date of the loan, consistent with the fiduciary role
of the committee.

(((7))) (6)
The committee may, at its discretion, determine to cease operation of the college
savings program if it determines the continuation is not in the best interest
of the state. The committee shall adopt rules to implement this section
addressing the orderly distribution of assets.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 2. This act is necessary for
the immediate preservation of the public peace, health, or safety, or support
of the state government and its existing public institutions, and takes effect
immediately.

---
END ---