BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF
WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1. RCW 41.24.050 and 1989 c
91 s 11 are each amended to read as follows:

((Each
municipal corporation shall by appropriate legislation limit the membership of
its volunteer fire department to not to exceed twenty-five fire fighters for
each one thousand population or fraction thereof: PROVIDED, That any fire
department maintaining and operating an emergency first aid and ambulance
service requiring emergency medical training under chapter 18.73 RCW shall be
permitted to increase its membership by the number of fire fighters obtaining
and maintaining such qualification: PROVIDED FURTHER, That)) No
person serving as an emergency medical technician or first aid vehicle operator
under chapter 18.73 RCW shall be permitted to join the law enforcement
officers' and fire fighters' retirement system solely on the basis of such
service((: PROVIDED FURTHER, That)). In no case shall the
membership of any fire department coming under the provisions of this chapter
be limited to less than fifteen fire fighters.

--- END ---