BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF
WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1. RCW 52.14.010 and 1998 c
121 s 2 are each amended to read as follows:

The affairs of the
district shall be managed by a board of fire commissioners composed initially
of three registered voters residing in the district except as provided in RCW
52.14.015 and 52.14.020. Each member shall each receive seventy dollars per
day or portion thereof, not to exceed six thousand seven hundred twenty dollars
per year, for attendance at board meetings and for performance of other
services in behalf of the district.

In addition, they shall
receive necessary expenses incurred in attending meetings of the board or when
otherwise engaged in district business, and shall be entitled to receive the
same insurance available to all fire fighters of the district: PROVIDED, That
the premiums for such insurance, except liability insurance, shall be paid by
the individual commissioners who elect to receive it.

Any commissioner may
waive all or any portion of his or her compensation payable under this section
as to any month or months during his or her term of office, by a written waiver
filed with the secretary as provided in this section. The waiver, to be
effective, must be filed any time after the commissioner's election and prior
to the date on which the compensation would otherwise be paid. The waiver
shall specify the month or period of months for which it is made.

The board shall fix the
compensation to be paid the secretary and all other agents and employees of the
district. The board may, by resolution adopted by unanimous vote, authorize
any of its members to serve as volunteer fire fighters without compensation. A
commissioner actually serving as a volunteer fire fighter may enjoy the rights
and benefits of a volunteer fire fighter.

Sec. 2. RCW 52.14.015 and 1994 c
223 s 50 are each amended to read as follows:

In the event a three
member board of commissioners of any fire protection district determines by
resolution that it would be in the best interest of the district to increase
the number of commissioners from three to five or seven, or in the event
the board is presented with a petition signed by ten percent of the registered
voters resident within the district who voted in the last general municipal
election calling for such an increase in the number of commissioners of the
district, the board shall submit a resolution to the county legislative
authority or authorities of the county or counties in which the district is
located requesting that an election be held. Upon receipt of the resolution,
the legislative authority or authorities of the county or counties shall call a
special election to be held within the fire protection district at which
election the following proposition shall be submitted to the voters
substantially as follows:

Shall the board of
commissioners of . . . . . county fire protection district
no. . . . . . be increased from three members to five (or
seven) members?

Yes
. . . . .

No
. . . . . .

If the fire protection
district is located in more than a single county, this proposition shall
indicate the name of the district.

If the
proposition receives a majority approval at the election, the board of
commissioners of the fire protection district shall be increased to five or
seven members. The two or four additional members shall be
appointed in the same manner as provided in RCW 52.14.020.

Sec. 3. RCW 52.14.013 and 1994 c
223 s 49 are each amended to read as follows:

The board of fire
commissioners of a fire protection district may adopt a resolution by unanimous
vote causing a ballot proposition to be submitted to voters of the district
authorizing the creation of commissioner districts. The board of fire
commissioners shall create commissioner districts if the ballot proposition
authorizing the creation of commissioner districts is approved by a simple
majority vote of the voters of the fire protection district voting on the
proposition. Three commissioner districts shall be created for a fire
protection district with three commissioners, ((and)) five commissioner
districts shall be created for a fire protection district with five
commissioners, and seven commissioner districts shall be created for a fire
protection district with seven commissioners. No two commissioners may
reside in the same commissioner district.

No change in the
boundaries of any commissioner district shall be made within one hundred twenty
days next before the date of a general district election, nor within twenty
months after the commissioner districts have been established or altered.
However, if a boundary change results in one commissioner district being
represented by two or more commissioners, those commissioners having the
shortest unexpired terms shall be assigned by the commission to commissioner
districts where there is a vacancy, and the commissioners so assigned shall be
deemed to be residents of the commissioner districts to which they are assigned
for purposes of determining whether those positions are vacant.

The population of each
commissioner district shall include approximately equal population.
Commissioner districts shall be redrawn as provided in chapter 29.70 RCW.
Commissioner districts shall be used as follows: (1) Only a registered voter
who resides in a commissioner district may be a candidate for, or serve as, a
commissioner of the commissioner district; and (2) only voters of a
commissioner district may vote at a primary to nominate candidates for a
commissioner of the commissioner district. Voters of the entire fire
protection district may vote at a general election to elect a person as a
commissioner of the commissioner district.

When a
board of fire commissioners that has commissioner districts has been increased
to five or seven members under RCW 52.14.015, the board of fire
commissioners shall divide the fire protection district into five or seven
commissioner districts before it appoints the two or four additional
fire commissioners. The two or four additional fire commissioners who
are appointed shall reside in separate commissioner districts in which no other
fire commissioner resides.

Sec. 4. RCW 52.14.017 and 1997 c
43 s 1 are each amended to read as follows:

Except as provided in
RCW 52.14.020, in the event a five-member or seven-member board of
commissioners of any fire protection district determines by resolution that it
would be in the best interest of the fire protection district to
decrease the number of commissioners from five to three or from seven to
five, or in the event the board is presented with a petition signed by ten
percent of the registered voters resident within the district who voted in the
last general municipal election calling for such a decrease in the number of
commissioners of the district, the board shall submit a resolution to the
county legislative authority or authorities of the county or counties in which
the district is located requesting that an election be held. Upon receipt of
the resolution, the legislative authority or authorities of the county or
counties shall call a special election to be held within the fire protection
district at which election the following proposition shall be submitted to the
voters substantially as follows:

Shall the board of
commissioners of . . . . . . county fire protection
district no. . . . be decreased from five (seven) members to
three (five) members?

Yes
. . .

No
. . .

If the fire protection
district has commissioner districts, the commissioners of the district must
pass a resolution, before the submission of the proposition to the voters, to
either redistrict from five or seven commissioner districts to three or
five commissioner districts or eliminate the commissioner districts. The
resolution takes effect upon approval of the proposition by the voters.

If the fire protection
district is located in more than a single county, this proposition shall
indicate the name of the district.

If the
proposition receives a majority approval at the election, the board of
commissioners of the fire protection district shall be decreased to five or
three members. The two members shall be decreased in accordance with RCW
52.06.085.

---
END ---