BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF
WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1. RCW 52.16.160 and 1985 c
112 s 1 are each amended to read as follows:

Notwithstanding
the limitation of dollar rates contained in RCW 52.16.130, and in addition to
any levy for the payment of the principal and interest of any outstanding
general obligation bonds and in addition to any levy authorized by RCW
52.16.130, 52.16.140 or any other statute, ((if in any county where a
township has never been formed or where there are one or more townships in
existence making annual tax levies and such township or townships are
disorganized as a result of a county-wide disorganization procedure prescribed
by statute and is no longer making any tax levy, or any township or townships
for any other reason no longer makes any tax levy,)) the board of fire
commissioners of any fire protection district within such county, which fire
protection district has at least one full-time, paid employee, or
contracts with another municipal corporation for the services of at least one
full-time, paid employee, is hereby authorized to levy each year an ad
valorem tax on all taxable property within such district of not to exceed fifty
cents per thousand dollars of assessed value, which levy may be made only if it
will not affect dollar rates which other taxing districts may lawfully claim
nor cause the combined levies to exceed the constitutional and/or statutory
limitations.

--- END ---