BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF
WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec.
1. A new section is added
to chapter 19.142 RCW to read as follows:

(1) The legislature
finds that the use of commercial health studio facilities by the public
includes a reliance on the part of the public of reasonable safe and sanitary
conditions in these facilities to avoid contagion from infectious diseases.
The health studio industry benefits by promoting accepted standards of
sanitation to assure their members and guests of a respect for their health and
safety. The legislature declares that it is in the interests of the public
health, safety, and welfare to establish requirements and guidelines for the
maintenance of minimum sanitary conditions and infection control in health
studios in order to assist these facilities in providing a healthy environment
for patrons with an interest in improving their health status.

(2) In consultation
with recognized professional health studio trade associations and other
recognized guidelines for infection control, the secretary of health shall
adopt by rule requirements for sanitation and infection control for health
studios whose services include a swimming pool, hot tub, steam room, sauna
room, or shower facilities.

(3) Any
person who owns or operates a health studio whose services include a swimming
pool, hot tub, steam room, sauna room, or shower facilities shall comply with
the rules adopted by the secretary of health for sanitation and infection
control under this section. A violation of a rule adopted under this section
is a misdemeanor.

--- END ---