BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF
WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1. RCW 34.05.330 and 1998 c
280 s 5 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) Any person may
petition an agency requesting the adoption, amendment, or repeal of any rule.
The office of financial management shall prescribe by rule the format for such
petitions and the procedure for their submission, consideration, and
disposition and provide a standard form that may be used to petition any
agency. An agency planning to consider a petition in an open public meeting
shall make a reasonable effort to provide the petitioner with at least
seventy-two hours' notice of the time and location of the meeting. Within
sixty days after submission of a petition, the agency shall either (a) deny the
petition in writing, stating (i) its reasons for the denial, specifically
addressing the concerns raised by the petitioner and by any relevant
materials that were submitted along with the petition, and, where
appropriate, (ii) the alternative means by which it will address the concerns
raised by the petitioner, or (b) initiate rule-making proceedings in accordance
with RCW 34.05.320.

(2) If an agency denies
a petition to repeal or amend a rule submitted under subsection (1) of this
section, and the petition alleges that the rule is not within the intent of the
legislature or was not adopted in accordance with all applicable provisions of
law, the person may petition for review of the rule by the joint administrative
rules review committee under RCW 34.05.655.

(3) If an agency denies
a petition to repeal or amend a rule submitted under subsection (1) of this
section, the petitioner, within thirty days of the denial, may appeal the
denial to the governor. The governor shall immediately file notice of the
appeal with the code reviser for publication in the Washington state register.
Within forty-five days after receiving the appeal, the governor shall either
(a) deny the petition in writing, stating (i) his or her reasons for the
denial, specifically addressing the concerns raised by the petitioner, and,
(ii) where appropriate, the alternative means by which he or she will address
the concerns raised by the petitioner; (b) for agencies listed in RCW
43.17.010, direct the agency to initiate rule-making proceedings in accordance
with this chapter; or (c) for agencies not listed in RCW 43.17.010, recommend
that the agency initiate rule-making proceedings in accordance with this
chapter. The governor's response to the appeal shall be published in the
Washington state register and copies shall be submitted to the chief clerk of
the house of representatives and the secretary of the senate.

(4) In petitioning for
repeal or amendment of a rule under this section, a person is encouraged to
address, among other concerns:

(a) Whether the rule is
authorized;

(b) Whether the rule is
needed;

(c) Whether the rule
conflicts with or duplicates other federal, state, or local laws;

(d) Whether
alternatives to the rule exist that will serve the same purpose at less cost;

(e) Whether the rule
applies differently to public and private entities;

(f) Whether the rule
serves the purposes for which it was adopted;

(g) Whether the costs
imposed by the rule are unreasonable;

(h) Whether the rule is
clearly and simply stated;

(i) Whether the rule is
different than a federal law applicable to the same activity or subject matter
without adequate justification; and

(j) Whether the rule
was adopted according to all applicable provisions of law.

(5) The department of
community, trade, and economic development and the office of financial
management shall coordinate efforts among agencies to inform the public about
the existence of this rules review process.

(6) The
office of financial management shall initiate the rule making required by
subsection (1) of this section by September 1, 1995.

--- END ---