BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF
WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1. RCW 15.100.010 and 2001
c 314 s 1 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) The
legislature finds that the creation of a forest products commission would
assist in expanding the state's economy, because:

(((1))) (a)
Marketing is a dynamic and changing part of the Washington forest products
industry and a vital element in expanding the state economy;

(((2))) (b)
The sale in the state and export to other states and abroad of forest products
made in the state contribute substantial benefits to the economy of the state,
provide a large number of jobs and sizeable tax revenues, and are key
components of the health of many local communities because many secondary
businesses are largely dependent on the health of the forest products industry;
((and

(3))) (c) Forest products are made from a
renewable resource and are more environmentally sound than many alternative
products;

(d) Proper promotion
of forest products is vital to the producers of these products and the
continued economic well-being of the citizens of the state; and

(e) Research related
to managed forests and the promotion of managed forests can yield critical
information for complying with the existing comprehensive state and federal
scheme regulating timber harvest.

(2) The legislature
also finds that any advertising, marketing, and public education related to the
sale of forest products by the forest products commission is government speech
that provides a benefit for the citizens of the state and is thereby entitled
to first amendment protection.

Sec. 2. RCW 15.100.030 and 2001
c 314 s 3 are each amended to read as follows:

(1)(a) There is created
a commodity commission to be known and designated as the Washington forest
products commission. The commission is composed of nine voting members. The
commission may, in its sole discretion, add or remove nonvoting ex officio members
to the commission. Of the members, six shall be from western Washington, and
three shall be from eastern Washington. After the initial election of
commission members, however, if a position cannot be filled by a member from
eastern Washington within sixty days from the date on which nominations may
first be received because of a lack of candidates, the position may be filled
by a member from western Washington. Under no circumstances will there be less
than two board members from eastern Washington. If a position was filled by a
member from western Washington because of a lack of candidates from eastern
Washington, and districts are not used for the nomination and election of
members, then a person from eastern Washington must fill the next available
vacancy or open position at the next election to bring the number of
representatives from eastern Washington up to three members. All members shall
be elected by the entire group of producers unless the commission creates
districts for the members as authorized in RCW 15.100.050. If districts are
used for the nomination and election of commission members, and it does not
appear that one of the positions from eastern Washington will be filled because
of a lack of candidates, then a commission member who resides in western
Washington must be elected by the entire group of producers as an at-large
member. The position of the western Washington member who is elected as an
at-large member shall be filled by a member from eastern Washington at the
expiration of the term of the at-large member. If districts are not used for
the nomination and election of members, the commission shall strive to achieve
representation on the commission from the different geographic regions of the
state.

(b) Of the six members
from western Washington, three members must have annual harvests of more than
seventy-five million board feet, and three members must have annual harvests
between two million board feet and seventy-five million board feet.

(c) Of the two members
from eastern Washington, one member must have an annual harvest greater than
forty million board feet, and one member must have an annual harvest between
two million board feet and forty million board feet. If there is a third
member from eastern Washington, the only harvest requirement is that the member
have an annual harvest of at least two million board feet.

(2) The members must be
citizens and residents of this state, and over the age of twenty-one years.
Each member must currently, and for the five years last preceding his or her
election, be actually engaged in producing forest products within the state of
Washington, either individually or as an officer of a corporation, firm,
partnership, trust, association, or business organization at the level of production
required to qualify as a producer. Each member must also derive a substantial
amount of his or her income from the production of forest products. The
qualifications set forth in this section apply throughout each member's term of
office.

(3) No more than one
member of the commission may be employed by, or connected in a proprietary
capacity with, the same corporation, firm, partnership, trust, association, or
business organization.

(4) Five voting members
of the commission constitute a quorum for the transaction of all business and
the carrying out of the duties of the commission.

(5) The regular term of
office of the members is four years from November 1st following their election
and until their successors are elected and qualified. However, the first terms
of the members elected in the initial November 1st((, 2001,))
election is as follows: Positions one, four, and seven terminate on
November 1st, ((2003)) two years after the initial election is
held; positions two, five, and eight terminate on November 1st,
((2004)) three years after the initial election is held; and
positions three, six, and nine terminate on November 1st, ((2005))
four years after the initial election is held.

Sec. 3. RCW 15.100.040 and 2001
c 314 s 4 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) The director shall
call the initial meeting of producers of forest products for the purpose of
nominating their respective members of the commission after receiving notice
from an association representing producers of forest products that substantial
interest exists in forming a forest products commission. Public notice of
the meeting shall be given by the director in the manner the director
determines is appropriate. A producer may on his or her own motion file his or
her name with the director for the purpose of receiving notice of the meeting.
The nonreceipt of the notice by any interested person does not invalidate the
proceedings.

(2) Prior to the
nomination of commission members, the department of revenue shall provide the
director with a list of all qualified producers within the state based upon tax
records of the department.

(3) For the initial
election of commission members, any qualified producer may be nominated orally
for a commissioner position at the meeting convened by the director.
Nominations may also be made within five days prior to the meeting by a written
petition filed with the department, signed by at least five producers who
reside in the state. If the director determines that one of the positions from
eastern Washington will go unfilled because of a lack of candidates, the
director shall announce that this position shall be filled by a member from
western Washington. If the position designated for eastern Washington is
filled by a member from western Washington because of a lack of candidates from
eastern Washington, this position shall be designated as position number seven
by the director for purposes of RCW 15.100.030(5). Under no circumstances will
there be less than two board members from eastern Washington.

(4) The initial members
of the commission shall be elected by secret mail ballot under the supervision
of the director at the same time the referendum is submitted under RCW
15.100.120 calling for the creation of the commission and the imposition of the
initial assessment. If a nominee does not receive a majority of the votes on
the first ballot, a run-off election shall be held by mail in a similar manner
between the two candidates for the position receiving the largest number of
votes.

(5) If the director
determines under RCW 15.100.120(3) that the requisite approval for the
establishment of a commission has not been given, any subsequent efforts to
create a commission must follow the procedures established under this chapter
for the initial nomination and election of members.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
4. A new section is added
to chapter 15.100 RCW to read as follows:

The
association responsible for giving the director notice under RCW 15.100.040 that
substantial interest exists in forming a forest products commission shall
reimburse the department for its costs associated with conducting a proceeding
to initiate a commission under RCW 15.100.040 and 15.100.120. If the necessary
approval is received for the creation of a commission, the commission shall
reimburse the association for the costs paid to the department when funds
become available.

---
END ---