BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF
WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec.
1. (1) Promptly upon
agreeing to provide legal services for a client, a lawyer shall provide the
client a written explanation of the scope of the legal services, the manner by
which charges for services or goods will be determined, and all other material
terms of their contractual relationship. Promptly upon agreeing to any
material changes in the scope or terms, the lawyer shall provide the client a
written explanation of the changes.

(2) Except to the
extent that a lawyer's claim to collect payment for legal services or related
goods or services is consistent with an explanation of the scope and terms of
the lawyer's engagement, and of any material changes, that was actually agreed
to in writing by the client, a lawyer may bring the claim only in a small
claims department of a district court in an amount within the jurisdictional
limit set by RCW 12.40.010 and must be represented there by a nonlawyer
employee or agent. In bringing such a claim, the lawyer has the burden of
proving by clear and convincing evidence that the client had been informed of
and had agreed to any contractual terms that were not explained and agreed to
in writing by the client.

(3) If a lawyer
provides legal services to a client through a professional services corporation
or other law firm that enters into a contractual relationship with the client,
the provisions of this section applicable to the lawyer also apply to the law
firm.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
2. If a lawyer refers a
client to a second lawyer not practicing in the same law firm as the first with
the intention or expectation that the second lawyer will pay a referral fee or
share fees from the client with the referring lawyer or law firm, the referring
lawyer shall provide the client a written explanation of the intended or
expected referral fee or sharing of fees before the client enters into a
contractual relationship with the second lawyer. The client may recover any
fees paid or shared by the second lawyer to the referring lawyer or law firm
that were not so explained to the client, or later agreed to in writing by the
client, in an action for disgorgement against either one or both lawyers or
their law firms commenced within three years after discovering the material
facts of the transaction.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
3. (1) At the time of
establishment of a professional relationship with a client, or as soon
thereafter as practicable, and within three-year intervals in the case of an
ongoing professional relationship with a client, a lawyer shall provide to the
client a written statement that discloses, in plain language, the circumstances
under which information relating to the client will be covered by the
attorney-client privilege or by the lawyer's duty of confidentiality, or both,
and the meaning of those concepts. The disclosure statement shall explain the
exceptions to the attorney-client privilege and to the lawyer's duty of
confidentiality that are recognized in state and federal court rules, statutory
law, and judicial decisions.

(2) At a minimum, the
disclosure statement required by this section shall explain each of the
following:

(a) The general
conditions under which information communicated between the client and the
lawyer is privileged from disclosure that otherwise could be compelled by
judicial authority;

(b) The types of
actions by the client that might cause the loss of the privilege as to
information initially covered by the attorney-client privilege;

(c) The general
conditions under which information gained by the lawyer is covered by the
lawyer's duty of confidentiality.

(3) The disclosure
statement should explain the extent to which the attorney-client privilege and
the lawyer's duty of confidentiality apply in each of the following
circumstances:

(a) To information
relating to the client if the client uses the lawyer's services to further a
crime or fraud or to conceal from discovery a crime or fraud, whether or not
the lawyer was aware of that purpose when providing the services;

(b) To information the
disclosure of which would mitigate or rectify substantial injury to the
financial interests or property of another that has resulted from the client's
commission of a crime or fraud in furtherance of which the client has used the
lawyer's services;

(c) To information that
the client or another person intends to physically harm or intimidate a judge
or a person who is not a judge;

(d) To information that
the lawyer reasonably believes is necessary to reveal in order to prevent the
client or another person from committing a crime;

(e) To information the
disclosure of which would rectify or correct perjury or other fraud by the
client or another person upon a tribunal;

(f) To information the
disclosure of which is necessary to comply with any law;

(g) To information that
the lawyer or client is directed to disclose by a court order or by a subpoena
issued by an attorney or a governmental official lawfully empowered to issue a
subpoena;

(h) To information the
lawyer discloses without the client's consent to another lawyer to secure legal
advice about the lawyer's compliance with any laws or rules governing the
lawyer;

(i) To information
acquired by the lawyer while providing services other than legal services, such
as business advisory services, investment advisory services, accounting
services, counseling services, lobbying services, or corporate director
services or while interacting socially or in a nonlawyer capacity with the
client;

(j) To information
acquired by the lawyer to prepare documents for disclosure to a third party, a
governmental agency, or the general public;

(k) To information
relating to conduct of the client in his or her capacity as a trustee or other
fiduciary if the information is sought by or on behalf of a beneficiary of the
trust or other fiduciary relationship;

(l) To information that
a client who is a guardian, personal representative, receiver, or other
court-appointed fiduciary has breached a fiduciary responsibility;

(m) To information that
the lawyer reasonably believes is necessary to reveal in order to establish a
claim or defense in a controversy with a client;

(n) To information that
the lawyer reasonably believes is necessary to reveal in order to establish a
defense to a criminal charge or civil claim against the lawyer based upon
conduct in which the client was involved;

(o) To information that
the lawyer reasonably believes is necessary to reveal in order to respond to
allegations in any proceeding concerning the lawyer's representation of the
client;

(p) To information from
a nonclient employee, officer, or director of a client organization if the
information is sought by another person on behalf of the organization or if the
lawyer's duty to the client organization requires that the lawyer voluntarily
disclose the information to the other person;

(q) To information that
the lawyer reasonably believes is necessary to reveal to protect the welfare or
financial interests of a client who the lawyer reasonably believes cannot
adequately act in his or her own interests;

(r) To information or
documents relating to a client that is sought by a guardian or other person
authorized to act for a client who has been adjudicated, or the lawyer
reasonably believes, to have lost legal capacity;

(s) To information
relating to a deceased client that the lawyer reasonably believes the
disclosure of which is necessary to further the client's intentions concerning
the disposition of the client's probate or nonprobate estate;

(t) To information that
relates to coclients jointly represented on a matter of common interest by the
lawyer, including the disclosure of information to each coclient before or
after the development of any adversity between them.

(4) A lawyer may comply
with this section by providing a disclosure statement that has been published
by either the Washington state bar association or the administrative office of
the courts for purposes of satisfying the requirements of this section;
provided that there has not elapsed more than three years since its publication,
or its republication without material revisions, or more than one year since
that organization's publication of any such disclosure statement with material
revisions.

(5) The failure of a
lawyer to provide to a client an adequate disclosure statement required by this
section, and the actions of a lawyer inconsistent with disclosures made in a
disclosure statement provided pursuant to this section, may be considered as
evidence by a court in any dispute between the lawyer and the client.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 4. Sections 1 through 3 of
this act are each added to chapter 2.48 RCW.

---
END ---