BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF
WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1. RCW 41.04.190 and 1996 c
230 s 1610 are each amended to read as follows:

The cost
of a policy or plan to a public agency or body is not additional compensation
to the employees or elected officials covered thereby. The elected officials
to whom this section applies include but are not limited to commissioners
elected under chapters 28A.315, 52.14, 53.12, 54.12, 57.12, 70.44, and 87.03
RCW, as well as any county elected officials who are provided insurance
coverage under RCW 41.04.180, and city officials elected under chapters
35.17, 35.22, 35.23, 35.27, 35A.12, and 35A.13 RCW. Such a policy or plan for
elected city officials must be adopted at an open meeting, must be included on
the council meeting agenda, and must be included as a line item in the city
budget. Any officer authorized to disburse such funds may pay in whole or
in part to an insurance carrier or health care service contractor the amount of
the premiums due under the contract.

--- END ---