BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF
WASHINGTON:

PART 1

SUPPLEMENTAL CAPITAL BUDGET

Sec. 101. 2001 2nd sp.s. c 8 s 117
(uncodified) is amended to read as follows:

FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF COMMUNITY, TRADE, AND ECONOMIC
DEVELOPMENT

Housing Assistance,
Weatherization, and Affordable Housing (02‑4‑010)

The appropriations in
this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations:

(1) At least $9,000,000
of the new appropriation from the state taxable building construction
account is provided solely for weatherization administered through the energy
matchmakers program.

(2) $5,000,000 of the
new appropriation from the state taxable building construction account
is provided solely to promote development of safe and affordable housing units
for persons eligible for services from the division of developmental
disabilities within the department of social and health services.

(3) $2,000,000 of the
appropriation from the state taxable building construction account is
provided solely for grants to nonprofit organizations and public housing
authorities for revolving loan, self-help housing programs for low and moderate
income families.

(4) $1,000,000 of the
new appropriation from the state taxable building construction account
is provided solely for shelters, transitional housing, or other housing
facilities for victims of domestic violence.

(5) Reappropriations in
this section shall not be included in the annual funds available for determining
the administrative costs authorized under RCW 43.185.050.

Appropriation:

State Taxable
Building Construction Account‑-

State.................................... $ 60,000,000

Washington Housing
Trust Account................ $ 5,000,000

Subtotal
Appropriation................... $ 65,000,000

Prior Biennia
(Expenditures).................... $ 0

Future Biennia
(Projected Costs)................ $ 200,000,000

TOTAL.................................... $ 265,000,000

NEW SECTION. Sec.
102. A new section is added
to 2001 2nd sp.s. c 8 (uncodified) to read as follows:

FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF
COMMUNITY, TRADE, & ECONOMIC DEVELOPMENT

Community Economic
Revitalization (CERB)(03-4-001)

The appropriation in
this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations: The
appropriation from the public facility construction loan revolving account
shall be used solely to provide loans to eligible local governments and grants
to the extent permissible by law. The department shall ensure that all
principal and interest payments from loans made on moneys from this account are
paid into this account.

Appropriation:

Public Facility
Construction Loan Revolving

Account‑-State........................... $ 3,294,000

Prior Biennia
(Expenditures).................... $ 0

Future Biennia
(Projected Costs)................ $ 0

TOTAL.................................... $ 3,294,000

Sec. 103. 2001 2nd sp.s. c 8 s 147
(uncodified) is amended to read as follows:

FOR THE OFFICE OF FINANCIAL
MANAGEMENT

Budget System
Improvements (02-1-004)

The appropriation in
this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations:

Funds are provided
solely for the following studies and activities:

(1) Budget evaluation
study team reviews of project proposals;

(2) The compilation of
benchmarking data and the development of standards for construction costs;

(3) Contracts
associated with a higher education facility financial responsibility study to
be conducted in conjunction with the higher education coordinating board and
the state board for community and technical colleges that shall provide
guidelines for project cost sharing between state and federal funds,
institutional funds, student fees and charges, and private donations; and

(4) Other studies and
system improvements planned in consultation with the house capital budget committee
and the senate committee on ways and means.

(5) $125,000 of the
appropriation in this section is provided solely to support the office of
financial management's reporting requirements under RCW 43.88.160 and
43.82.150.

Appropriation:

State Building
Construction Account‑-State...... $ ((200,000))

325,000

Prior Biennia
(Expenditures).................... $ 0

Future Biennia
(Projected Costs)................ $ 1,200,000

TOTAL.................................... $ ((1,400,000))

1,525,000

NEW SECTION. Sec.
104. A new section is added
to 2001 2nd sp.s. c 8 (uncodified) to read as follows:

FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF GENERAL
ADMINISTRATION

Capitol Campus Parking
(03-2-001)

The appropriation in
this section is subject to the following condition and limitation: The
department shall designate parking spaces on the west capitol campus, except
for public parking, as leased parking per WAC 236-12-290(1)(b)(ii).

Appropriation:

State Vehicle Parking
Account‑-State............. $ 531,000

Prior Biennia
(Expenditures).................... $ 0

Future Biennia
(Projected Costs)................ $ 0

TOTAL.................................... $ 531,000

NEW SECTION. Sec.
105. A new section is added
to 2001 2nd sp.s. c 8 (uncodified) to read as follows:

FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF SOCIAL AND
HEALTH SERVICES

Western State Hospital
- Power Plant Revisions and Smokestack Removal (03-1-012)

Appropriation:

State Building
Construction Account‑‑State...... $ 1,080,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures).................... $ 0

Future Biennia
(Projected Costs)................ $ 0

TOTAL.................................... $ 1,080,000

Sec. 106. 2001 2nd sp.s. c 8 s 257
(uncodified) is amended to read as follows:

FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF
CORRECTIONS

Expand Coyote Ridge
Corrections Center (98‑2‑011)

Reappropriation:

State Building
Construction Account‑‑State.. $ 447,348

Appropriation:

State Building
Construction Account‑‑

State............................... $ ((1,150,000))

10,497,000

Prior Biennia
(Expenditures)............... $ 802,069

Future Biennia
(Projected Costs)........... $ ((227,763,000))

218,863,348

TOTAL............................... $ 230,162,417

Sec. 107. 2001 2nd sp.s. c 8 s 270
(uncodified) is amended to read as follows:

FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF
CORRECTIONS

Monroe Corrections
Center - 100 Bed Intensive Management and Segregation Units (00‑2‑008)

The appropriations in
this section are subject to the conditions and limitations of sections 902 and
903 of this act.

Reappropriation:

State Building
Construction Account‑‑

State............................... $ 40,665

Appropriation:

General Fund‑‑Federal...................... $ ((18,162,205))

11,933,692

State Building
Construction Account‑‑

State............................... $ ((2,521,795))

8,750,308

Subtotal
Appropriation.............. $ 20,684,000

Prior Biennia
(Expenditures)............... $ 149,335

Future Biennia
(Projected Costs)........... $ 17,727,000

TOTAL............................... $ 38,601,000

Sec. 108. 2001 2nd sp.s. c 8 s 278
(uncodified) is amended to read as follows:

FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF
CORRECTIONS

Statewide: Department
of Corrections Emergency Funds (02‑1‑028)

Appropriation:

Charitable,
Educational, Penal, and Reformatory

Institutions
Account‑‑State......... $ 1,700,000

State Building
Construction Account‑-

State.... ........................... $ 850,000

Prior Biennia
(Expenditures)............... $ 901,000

Future Biennia
(Projected Costs)........... $ 7,800,000

TOTAL............................... $ ((10,401,000))

11,251,000

NEW SECTION. Sec.
109. A new section is added
to 2001 2nd sp.s. c 8 (uncodified) to read as follows:

FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF
CORRECTIONS

Airway Heights
Corrections Center - 170 Emergency Beds (03-2-003)

The appropriation in
this section is subject to the conditions and limitations of sections 902 and
903 of this act.

Appropriation:

State Building
Construction Account‑-State...... $ 2,213,000

Prior Biennia
(Expenditures).................... $ 0

Future Biennia
(Projected Costs)................ $ 0

TOTAL.................................... $ 2,213,000

NEW SECTION. Sec.
110. A new section is added
to 2001 2nd sp.s. c 8 (uncodified) to read as follows:

FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF
CORRECTIONS

Coyote Ridge
Corrections Center - 210 Emergency Beds (03-2-002)

The appropriation in
this section is subject to the conditions and limitations of sections 902 and
903 of this act.

Appropriation:

State Building
Construction Account‑-State...... $ 3,394,000

Prior Biennia
(Expenditures).................... $ 0

Future Biennia
(Projected Costs)................ $ 0

TOTAL.................................... $ 3,394,000

NEW SECTION. Sec.
111. A new section is added
to 2001 2nd sp.s. c 8 (uncodified) to read as follows:

FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF
CORRECTIONS

McNeil Island
Corrections Center (MICC): Water Tank Replacement (03-1-022)

Appropriation:

State Building
Construction Account‑-State...... $ 1,394,000

Prior Biennia
(Expenditures).................... $ 0

Future Biennia
(Projected Costs)................ $ 0

TOTAL.................................... $ 1,394,000

NEW SECTION. Sec.
112. A new section is added
to 2001 2nd sp.s. c 8 (uncodified) to read as follows:

FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF
CORRECTIONS

McNeil Island
Corrections Center (MICC): Fire Audit Requirements (03-2-001)

Appropriation:

State Building
Construction Account‑-State...... $ 140,500

Prior Biennia
(Expenditures).................... $ 0

Future Biennia
(Projected Costs)................ $ 0

TOTAL.................................... $ 140,500

Sec. 113. 2001 2nd sp.s. c 8 s 303
(uncodified) is amended to read as follows:

FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF ECOLOGY

Local Toxics Grants to
Locals for Cleanup and Prevention (88-2-008)

The appropriations in
this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations:

(1) The reappropriation
in this section is provided solely for projects under contract on or before
June 30, 2001. Reappropriated funds not associated with contracted projects
shall lapse on June 30, 2001. The office of financial management may grant
waivers from this lapse requirement for specific projects upon findings of
exceptional circumstances after notification of the chairs of the house of
representatives capital budget committee and senate ways and means committee.

(2) The department
shall submit a report to the office of financial management and house of representatives
capital budget committee and senate ways and means committee by December 1,
2001, listing all projects funded from this section.

(3) The department of
ecology shall offer the port of Ridgefield a funding package totaling
$8,400,000 to conduct an emergency cleanup action on port-owned property. A
portion of the appropriation in this section shall be combined with funds from
the appropriation to the department from the state toxics control account in
the omnibus operating budget for the 2001-2003 biennium to provide a funding
package consisting of sixty-five percent grant and thirty-five percent loan.
The terms of the loan shall provide for repayment by the port of Ridgefield
commencing ten years from the effective date of this section and is contingent
upon an independent financial audit conducted at the direction of the
department to determine the port's ability to repay the loan. It is the intent
of the legislature to support necessary action by the port of Ridgefield to
protect public health and the environment without jeopardizing the port's
financial standing.

Reappropriation:

Local Toxics Control
Account‑-State........ $ 20,749,772

Appropriation:

Local Toxics Control
Account‑-State........ $ ((50,000,000))

63,500,000

Prior Biennia
(Expenditures).. ............ $ 84,103,008

Future Biennia
(Projected Costs)........... $ 0

TOTAL............................... $ ((154,852,780))

167,552,780

Sec. 114. 2001 2nd sp.s. c 8 s 344
(uncodified) is amended to read as follows:

FOR THE INTERAGENCY
COMMITTEE FOR OUTDOOR RECREATION

Boating Facilities
Projects (02-4-001)

Appropriation:

Recreation Resources
Account‑-State........ $ ((8,318,013))

6,934,013

Prior Biennia
(Expenditures)............... $ 0

Future Biennia
(Projected Costs)........... $ 40,300,368

TOTAL.................. ............ $ ((48,618,381))

47,234,381

Sec. 115. 2001 2nd sp.s. c 8 s 346
(uncodified) is amended to read as follows:

FOR THE INTERAGENCY
COMMITTEE FOR OUTDOOR RECREATION

Nonhighway Road and
Off-Road Vehicle Activities (NOVA) (02-4-002)

(1) The appropriation
in this section for the nonhighway and off-road vehicle program under RCW
46.09.170(1)(d)(i) is subject to the following conditions and limitations: ((Fifty
percent)) A portion of the new appropriation ((is provided solely))
may be used for grants to projects to research, develop, publish, and
distribute informational guides and maps of nonhighway and off-road vehicle
trails and associated facilities meeting the requirements, guidelines, spirit,
and intent of the federal Americans with disabilities act.

(2) The appropriation
in this section for the nonhighway and off-road vehicle program under RCW
46.09.170(1)(d)(ii) is subject to the following conditions and limitations:
The portion of the new appropriation that applies to grants for capital
facilities ((is provided solely)) may be used for grants to
projects that meet the requirements, guidelines, spirit, and intent of the
federal Americans with disabilities act ((and do not compromise or impair
sensitive natural resources)). The portion of the new appropriation that
applies to grants for management, maintenance, and operation of existing
off-road vehicle recreation facilities may be used to bring the facilities into
compliance with the requirements, guidelines, spirit, and intent of the federal
Americans with disabilities act.

(3) The appropriation
in this section for the nonhighway and off-road vehicle program under RCW
46.09.170(1)(d)(iii) is subject to the following conditions and limitations:
$175,000 is provided solely for the interagency committee for outdoor
recreation to contract with an independent entity to study the source and make
recommendations on the distribution and use of funds provided to off-road
vehicle and nonhighway road recreational activities under RCW 46.09.170. The
study shall determine the relative portion of the motor vehicle fuel tax
revenues that are attributable to vehicles operating off-road or on nonhighway
roads for recreational purposes as provided in RCW 46.09.170. The study shall
include the types of vehicles and location of their use, the types of
recreational activities, the types of recreational facilities used, and the
recreational use of forest roads relative to other, nonrecreational uses. The
interagency committee for outdoor recreation shall review the analysis and
submit a report to the standing committees of the legislature, including
recommendations regarding amendments to RCW 46.09.170 to: (a) Allocate
revenues consistent with the relative proportion of the uses generating such
revenues, and (b) ensure funding for existing off-road vehicle facilities
operated by the state parks and recreation commission and local governments.
The report shall be submitted no later than December 1, 2002.

Appropriation:

NOVA Program Account‑-State..................... $ 5,527,551

Prior Biennia
(Expenditures).................... $ 0

Future Biennia
(Projected Costs)................ $ 23,559,218

TOTAL.................................... $ 29,086,769

Sec. 116. 2001 2nd sp.s. c 8 s 350
(uncodified) is amended to read as follows:

FOR THE INTERAGENCY COMMITTEE
FOR OUTDOOR RECREATION

Land and Water
Conservation Fund (LWCF) (02-4-005)

The appropriation in
this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations:

(1) $1,500,000 of the
recreation resources account‑‑federal is appropriated for projects
chosen by the interagency committee for outdoor recreation.

(2) By January 1, 2002,
the interagency committee for outdoor recreation shall provide a report to the
legislature that:

(a) Describes those
projects funded subject to subsection (1) of this section; and

(b) Recommends
legislation creating a competitive process for the selection of projects that
will result in a list of projects to be submitted to the legislature for its
approval.

Appropriation:

Recreation Resources
Account‑-Federal........... $ ((2,500,000))

5,500,000

Prior Biennia
(Expenditures).................... $ 0

Future Biennia
(Projected Costs)................ $ 0

TOTAL.................................... $ ((2,500,000))

5,500,000

NEW SECTION. Sec.
117. A new section is added
to 2001 2nd sp.s. c 8 (uncodified) to read as follows:

FOR THE INTERAGENCY
COMMITTEE FOR OUTDOOR RECREATION

Firearms and Archery
Range Program (FARR)(03-4-001)

Appropriation:

Firearms Range Account‑-State................... $ 400,000

Prior Biennia
(Expenditures).................... $ 0

Future Biennia
(Projected Costs)................ $ 0

TOTAL.................................... $ 400,000

Sec. 118. 2001 2nd sp.s. c 8 s 383
(uncodified) is amended to read as follows:

FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF FISH AND
WILDLIFE

Deep Water Slough
Restoration (98‑2‑013)

The reappropriation in
this section is subject to the conditions and limitations of section 906(2)(b)
of this act.

Reappropriation:

State Building
Construction Account‑‑State...... $ 400,000

Appropriation:

State Building
Construction Account‑‑State...... $ 407,000

General Fund-Basic
Account‑-Federal............. $ 155,800

Subtotal
Appropriation................... $ 562,800

Prior Biennia
(Expenditures).................... $ 0

Future Biennia
(Projected Costs)................ $ 0

TOTAL.................................... $ ((400,000))

962,800

Sec. 119. 2001 2nd sp.s. c 8 s 387
(uncodified) is amended to read as follows:

FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF
FISH AND WILDLIFE

Hatchery Reform
Facility Retrofits (02-1-001)

The appropriation in
this section is subject to the conditions and limitations of sections 905 and
906 of this act.

Appropriation:

General Fund‑-Federal.................. ... $ ((10,000,000))

2,000,000

Prior Biennia
(Expenditures)............... $ 0

Future Biennia
(Projected Costs)........... $ 60,000,000

TOTAL............................... $ ((70,000,000))

62,000,000

NEW SECTION. Sec.
120. A new section is added
to 2001 2nd sp.s. c 8 (uncodified) to read as follows:

FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF NATURAL
RESOURCES

Natural Resources Real
Property Replacement Program (03-2-001)

Appropriation:

Natural Resources Real
Property Replacement

Account‑-State........................... $ 20,000,000

Prior Biennia
(Expenditures).................... $ 0

Future Biennia
(Projected Costs)................ $ 0

TOTAL.................................... $ 20,000,000

NEW SECTION. Sec.
121. A new section is added
to 2001 2nd sp.s. c 8 (uncodified) to read as follows:

FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF
NATURAL RESOURCES

Land Bank Program
(03-2-002)

Appropriation:

Resource Management
Cost Account‑-State......... $ 6,000,000

Prior Biennia
(Expenditures).................... $ 0

Future Biennia
(Projected Costs)................ $ 0

TOTAL.................................... $ 6,000,000

Sec. 122. 2001 2nd sp.s. c 8 s 427
(uncodified) is amended to read as follows:

FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF
NATURAL RESOURCES

Larch Mountain Road
Reconstruction (01‑S‑001)

The appropriation in
this section is provided solely to reconstruct the Larch Mountain road to
provide safe access to the Larch Mountain correction camp and
department-managed state forest lands. Expenditure of the $1,000,000 state
building and construction account appropriation is contingent upon the
department of natural resources utilizing the nonappropriated access road
revolving fund to complete reconstruction of the Larch Mountain road. The
expenditure of total state appropriated funds for this project shall not exceed
$1,000,000.

Appropriation:

Access Road Revolving
Fund‑‑Nonappropriated..... $ ((3,000,000))

2,000,000

State Building
Construction Account‑‑State...... $ 1,000,000

Subtotal
Appropriation................... $ ((4,000,000))

3,000,000

Prior Biennia
(Expenditures).................... $ 0

Future Biennia
(Projected Costs)................ $ 0

TOTAL.................................... $ ((4,000,000))

3,000,000

Sec. 123. 2001 2nd sp.s. c 8 s 602
(uncodified) is amended to read as follows:

FOR THE STATE BOARD OF EDUCATION

State School
Construction Assistance Grants (02-4-001)

The appropriation in
this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations:

(1) $200,000 from this
appropriation is provided to fund up to two FTEs in the office of state fire
marshal to exclusively review K‑12 construction documents for fire and
life safety in accordance with the state building code. It is the intent of
this appropriation to provide these services only to those districts that are
located in counties without qualified review capabilities.

(2) Of the fiscal year
2002 appropriation, $80,000 is provided solely for skills centers study and
survey.

(3) For state
assistance grants starting July 1, 2001, for purposes of calculating square
foot eligibility, kindergarten student headcount shall not be reduced by fifty
percent.

(4) $5,400,000 from
this appropriation is provided for skills centers capital improvements. Skills
centers shall submit a budget plan to the state board of education and the
appropriate fiscal committees of the legislature for proposed expenditures and
the proposed expenditures shall conform with state board of education rules and
procedures for reimbursement of capital items. Funds not expended by June 30,
2003, shall lapse.

(5)(a) $30,530,000 of
this appropriation is provided solely to enhance the state contribution as
follows:

(i) For the state board
to increase the eligible square feet allocation by 1.5 square feet for grades
1-12; and

(ii) For the state
board to increase the area cost allowance by $8 per square foot for grades
K-12.

(b) If chapter
. . . (House Bill No. 2173), Laws of 2001 2nd sp. sess. is not
enacted by June 30, 2001, both the appropriation and the state board's
authority to increase the eligible square feet and area cost allowance in this
subsection (5) shall lapse.

Appropriation:

Common School
Construction

Account‑-State
(((FY 2002).......... $ 212,040,308

Common School
Construction

Account‑-State
(FY 2003)............. $ 226,846,421))

............................................... $ 343,656,729

Prior Biennia
(Expenditures)............... $ 0

Future Biennia
(Projected Costs)........... $ 1,831,522,031

TOTAL............................... $ ((2,269,909,260))

2,175,178,760

Sec. 124. 2001 2nd sp.s. c 8 s 634
(uncodified) is amended to read as follows:

FOR THE UNIVERSITY OF WASHINGTON

UW Tacoma Phase 2B
(02-2-027)

The appropriation in
this section is subject to the conditions and limitations of sections 902, 903,
and 904 of this act. No money may be expended that would be inconsistent with
the recommendations of the higher education coordinating board and the project
design, scope, and schedule approved by the office of financial management.

Appropriation:

((State Building
Construction Account‑-State))

Educational Capital
Construction Account‑-State. $ 40,899,000

University of
Washington Building

Account‑-State........................... $ 1,000,000

Subtotal
Appropriation................... $ 41,899,000

Prior Biennia
(Expenditures).................... $ 3,450,000

Future Biennia
(Projected Costs)................ $ 0

TOTAL.................................... $ 45,349,000

Sec. 125. 2001 2nd sp.s. c 8 s 658
(uncodified) is amended to read as follows:

FOR WASHINGTON STATE
UNIVERSITY

WSU Pullman - Energy
Plant - Heat: Renovation (02-1-501)

The appropriation in
this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations:

(1) The appropriation
in this section is subject to the conditions and limitations of sections 902
and 903 of this act.

(2)(a) Any agreement or
contract for the modernization or replacement of the existing steam generation
plant currently located on the Pullman campus must comply with chapter 39.35C
RCW. Prior to entering into an agreement or contract obligating itself on this
project, the university shall have the project reviewed by the appropriate
staff of the energy division of the department of community, trade, and
economic development and the department of general administration, and shall
consider any comments and suggestions made by these departments. If the
project involves a private energy development firm, the following issues shall
be considered in the development and implementation of the project:

(i) Regional and local
utility needs for power;

(ii) Cost and certainty
of fuel supplies;

(iii) Value of
electricity produced and options for sale of surplus electricity;

(iv) The capability of the
university to own and operate the facility should the private party terminate
its involvement;

(v) Costs associated
with interconnection with the local electric utility's transmission system;

(vi) Capability of the
local electric utility to wheel electricity generated by the facility and the
costs associated with wheeling;

(vii) Potential
financial risks to the state or the university and measures to mitigate any
risks; and

(viii) Benefits to the
state and the university from the project including design configuration,
ownership arrangement, operations, and financial arrangements for the project
based on the selection of project participants.

(b) The university
shall report to the office of financial management and the energy and fiscal
committees of the legislature on the development and implementation of this
project, including consideration of the issues and the agency suggestions under
subsection (2)(a) of this section, in December of 2001 and 2002.

Appropriation:

((State Building
Construction Account‑-State))

Educational Capital
Construction Account‑-State. $ 23,000,000

Prior Biennia
(Expenditures).................... $ 0

Future Biennia
(Projected Costs)................ $ 0

TOTAL.................................... $ 23,000,000

Sec. 126. 2001 2nd sp.s. c 8 s 667
(uncodified) is amended to read as follows:

FOR WASHINGTON STATE
UNIVERSITY

WSU Pullman - Murrow
Hall Addition: New Facility (98-2-008)

The appropriations in
this section are subject to the conditions and limitations of sections 902 and
903 of this act.

Reappropriation:

State Building
Construction Account‑-State...... $ 1,250,000

Appropriation:

((State Building
Construction Account‑-State))

Educational Capital
Construction Account‑-State. $ 10,910,000

Prior Biennia
(Expenditures).................... $ 400,000

Future Biennia
(Projected Costs)................ $ 0

TOTAL.................................... $ 12,560,000

Sec. 127. 2001 2nd sp.s. c 8 s 680
(uncodified) is amended to read as follows:

FOR EASTERN WASHINGTON
UNIVERSITY

EWU Roof Replacement
(02-1-004)

Appropriation:

((State Building
Construction Account‑-State))

Educational Capital
Construction Account‑-State. $ $2,619,000

Prior Biennia
(Expenditures).................... $ 2,425,000

Future Biennia
(Projected Costs)................ $ 6,000,000

TOTAL.................................... $ 11,044,000

NEW SECTION. Sec.
128. A new section is added
to 2001 2nd sp.s. c 8 (uncodified) to read as follows:

FOR EASTERN WASHINGTON
UNIVERSITY

Infrastructure Savings
(03-1-001)

Projects that are
completed in accordance with section 915 of this act may have their remaining
funds transferred to this appropriation for other preservation projects
approved by the office of financial management.

Appropriation:

State Building
Construction Account‑-State...... $ 1

Prior Biennia
(Expenditures).................... $ 0

Future Biennia
(Projected Costs)................ $ 0

TOTAL.................................... $ 1

Sec. 129. 2001 2nd sp.s. c 8 s 700
(uncodified) is amended to read as follows:

FOR CENTRAL WASHINGTON
UNIVERSITY

McConnell Stage and
Classroom Remodel (02-1-004)

The appropriation in
this section is subject to the conditions and limitations of section 906 of
this act.

Appropriation:

((State Building
Construction Account‑-State))

Educational Capital
Construction Account‑-State. $ $2,100,000

Prior Biennia
(Expenditures).................... $ 0

Future Biennia
(Projected Costs)................ $ 0

TOTAL.................................... $ 2,100,000

Sec. 130. 2001 2nd sp.s. c 8 s 702
(uncodified) is amended to read as follows:

FOR CENTRAL WASHINGTON
UNIVERSITY

Steam/Electric/Chilled
Water/Fiber Optic (98-1-120)

The appropriations in
this section are subject to the conditions and limitations of section 906 of
this act.

Appropriation:

((State Building
Construction Account‑-State))

Educational Capital
Construction Account‑-State. $ $6,000,000

Education Construction
Account‑-State........... $ 2,000,000

Subtotal
Appropriation................... $ 8,000,000

Prior Biennia
(Expenditures).................... $ 1,500,000

Future Biennia
(Projected Costs)................ $ 0

TOTAL.................................... $ 9,500,000

Sec. 131. 2001 2nd sp.s. c 8 s 712
(uncodified) is amended to read as follows:

FOR THE EVERGREEN STATE
COLLEGE

Seminar Building Phase
2 - Construction (02-2-004)

The appropriation in
this section is subject to the conditions and limitations of sections 902 and
903 of this act.

Appropriation:

((State Building
Construction Account‑-State))

Educational Capital
Construction Account‑-State. $ $37,550,000

Education Construction
Account‑-State........... $ 2,750,000

The Evergreen State College
Capital

Projects Account‑-State.................. $ 700,000

Subtotal
Appropriation................... $ 41,000,000

Prior Biennia
(Expenditures).................... $ 0

Future Biennia
(Projected Costs)................ $ 0

TOTAL.................................... $ 41,000,000

Sec. 132. 2001 2nd sp.s. c 8 s 724
(uncodified) is amended to read as follows:

FOR WESTERN WASHINGTON
UNIVERSITY

Communications Facility
(98-2-053)

The appropriations in
this section are subject to the conditions and limitations of sections 902 and
903 of this act.

Reappropriation:

State Building
Construction Account‑-State...... $ 2,500,000

Appropriation:

((State Building
Construction Account‑-State))

Educational Capital
Construction Account‑-State. $ $27,519,000

Education Construction
Account‑-State........... $ 5,000,000

Subtotal
Appropriation................... $ 32,519,000

Prior Biennia
(Expenditures).................... $ 1,454,400

Future Biennia
(Projected Costs)................ $ 4,000,000

TOTAL.................................... $ 40,473,400

Sec. 133. 2001 2nd sp.s. c 8 s 749
(uncodified) is amended to read as follows:

FOR THE COMMUNITY AND TECHNICAL
COLLEGE SYSTEM

Bellingham Technical
College - Health/Business Building: New Facility (98-2-672)

The appropriations in
this section are subject to the review and allotment procedures under sections
902 and 903 of this act.

Reappropriation:

State Building
Construction Account‑-State...... $ 661,660

Appropriation:

((State Building
Construction Account‑-State))

Educational Capital
Construction Account‑-State. $ $8,086,600

Prior Biennia
(Expenditures).................... $ 188,339

Future Biennia
(Projected Costs)................ $ 0

TOTAL.................................... $ 8,936,599

Sec. 134. 2001 2nd sp.s. c 8 s 750
(uncodified) is amended to read as follows:

FOR THE COMMUNITY AND
TECHNICAL COLLEGE SYSTEM

Lake Washington - Phase
3: New Facility (98-2-673)

The appropriations in
this section are subject to the review and allotment procedures under sections
902 and 903 of this act.

Reappropriation:

State Building
Construction Account‑-State...... $ 642,251

Appropriation:

((State Building
Construction Account‑-State))

Educational Capital
Construction Account‑-State. $ $15,840,000

Prior Biennia
(Expenditures).................... $ 522,749

Future Biennia
(Projected Costs)................ $ 0

TOTAL.................................... $ 17,005,000

Sec. 135. 2001 2nd sp.s. c 8 s 751
(uncodified) is amended to read as follows:

FOR THE COMMUNITY AND
TECHNICAL COLLEGE SYSTEM

Renton Technical
College - Technology Resource Center (98-2-674)

The appropriations in
this section are subject to the review and allotment procedures under sections
902 and 903 of this act.

Reappropriation:

State Building
Construction Account‑-State...... $ 663,699

Appropriation:

((State Building
Construction Account‑-State))

Educational Capital
Construction Account‑-State. $ $10,591,000

Prior Biennia
(Expenditures).................... $ 516,301

Future Biennia
(Projected Costs)................ $ 0

TOTAL.................................... $ 11,771,000

Sec. 136. 2001 2nd sp.s. c 8 s 752
(uncodified) is amended to read as follows:

FOR THE COMMUNITY AND
TECHNICAL COLLEGE SYSTEM

Skagit Valley College -
Whidbey Higher Education Center (98-2-675)

The appropriations in
this section are subject to the review and allotment procedures under sections
902 and 903 of this act.

Reappropriation:

State Building
Construction Account‑-State...... $ 455,201

Appropriation:

((State Building
Construction Account‑-State))

Educational Capital
Construction Account‑-State. $ $9,175,300

Prior Biennia
(Expenditures).................... $ 289,112

Future Biennia
(Projected Costs)................ $ 0

TOTAL.................................... $ 9,919,613

Sec. 137. 2001 2nd sp.s. c 8 s 755
(uncodified) is amended to read as follows:

FOR THE COMMUNITY AND
TECHNICAL COLLEGE SYSTEM

Columbia Basin College
- Electrical Substation (((99-H-004))) (99-1-004)

Reappropriation:

State Building
Construction Account‑-State...... $ 770,134

Prior Biennia
(Expenditures).................... $ 229,866

Future Biennia
(Projected Costs)................ $ 0

TOTAL.................................... $ 1,000,000

Sec. 138. 2001 2nd sp.s. c 8 s 809
(uncodified) is amended to read as follows:

FOR THE COMMUNITY AND
TECHNICAL COLLEGE SYSTEM

Spokane Falls Community
College ‑ Library: Renovation (02‑1‑331)

The appropriation in this
section is subject to the review and allotment procedures under sections 902
and 903 of this act.

Appropriation:

((State Building
Construction Account‑‑State))

Educational Capital
Construction Account‑-State. $ $5,602,000

Prior Biennia
(Expenditures).................... $ 0

Future Biennia
(Projected Costs)................ $ 0

TOTAL.................................... $ 5,602,000

Sec. 139. 2001 2nd sp.s. c 8 s 824
(uncodified) is amended to read as follows:

FOR THE COMMUNITY AND
TECHNICAL COLLEGE SYSTEM

Technology Institute
Partner College Computer Labs (((01-S-003))) (01-2-689)

The appropriation in
this section is provided to construct and equip three computer science and
language labs, an approximate size being 1,200 square feet, one at each of the
following college districts: Highline, Olympic, and South Puget Sound.

Appropriation:

State Building
Construction Account‑-State...... $ 1,500,000

Prior Biennia
(Expenditures).................... $ 0

Future Biennia
(Projected Costs)................ $ 0

TOTAL.................................... $ 1,500,000

Sec. 140. 2001 2nd sp.s. c 8 s 828
(uncodified) is amended to read as follows:

FOR THE COMMUNITY AND
TECHNICAL COLLEGE SYSTEM

Tacoma Science
Building: New Facility (((01-S-001))) (01-2-687)

The appropriation in
this section is provided to conduct a predesign of the project described in
this section in accordance with the predesign manual published by the office of
financial management. Future appropriations for this project are subject to the
submittal of completed predesign requirements on or before July 1, 2002.

Appropriation:

State Building
Construction Account‑-State...... $ 100,000

Prior Biennia
(Expenditures).................... $ 0

Future Biennia
(Projected Costs)................ $ 18,300,000

TOTAL.................................... $ 18,400,000

Sec. 141. 2001 2nd sp.s. c 8 s 829
(uncodified) is amended to read as follows:

FOR THE COMMUNITY AND
TECHNICAL COLLEGE SYSTEM

Green River Community
College - Sciences Building: New Facility (((01-S-002))) (01-2-688)

The appropriation in
this section is provided to conduct a predesign of the project described in
this section in accordance with the predesign manual published by the office of
financial management. Future appropriations for this project are subject to
the submittal of completed predesign requirements on or before July 1, 2002.

Appropriation:

State Building
Construction Account‑-State...... $ 100,000

Prior Biennia
(Expenditures).................... $ 0

Future Biennia
(Projected Costs)................ $ 18,300,000

TOTAL.................................... $ 18,400,000

Sec. 142. 2001 2nd sp.s. c 8 s 907
(uncodified) is amended to read as follows:

ACQUISITION OF
PROPERTIES AND FACILITIES THROUGH FINANCIAL CONTRACTS. The following agencies
may enter into financial contracts, paid from any funds of an agency,
appropriated or nonappropriated, for the purposes indicated and in not more
than the principal amounts indicated, plus financing expenses and required
reserves pursuant to chapter 39.94 RCW. When securing properties under this
section, agencies shall use the most economical financial contract option
available, including long-term leases, lease-purchase agreements,
lease-development with option to purchase agreements or financial contracts
using certificates of participation. Expenditures made by an agency for one of
the indicated purposes before the issue date of the authorized financial
contract may be reimbursed from proceeds of the financial contract to the
extent provided in the financing plan approved by the state finance committee.

The director of general
administration shall ensure that the clustering of state facilities and the
collocation and consolidation of state agencies take place where such
configurations are economical and consistent with agency space needs. Agencies
shall assist the department of general administration with facility collocation
and consolidation efforts.

State agencies may
enter into agreements with the department of general administration and the
state treasurer's office to develop requests to the legislature for acquisition
of properties and facilities through financial contracts. The agreements may
include charges for services rendered.

(1) Secretary of state:

(a) Enter into a
financing contract in the amount of $13,582,200 plus financing expenses and
required reserves pursuant to chapter 39.94 RCW to purchase or construct a
regional archives building in eastern Washington to be sited on the Eastern
Washington University campus in Cheney.

(b) Enter into a
financing contract in the amount of $653,800 plus financing expenses and
required reserves pursuant to chapter 39.94 RCW to purchase technology
equipment and software for an electronic data archive, provided that authority
to expend funding for acquisition of technology equipment and software
associated with the electronic data archive is conditioned on compliance with
section 902 of the 2001-2003 operating budget bill (information services
projects).

(2) Department of
general administration:

(a) Enter into a
financing contract in the amount of $3,956,000 plus financing expenses and
required reserves pursuant to chapter 39.94 RCW, to expand the existing
Isabella Bush records center in Tumwater for use by state agencies.

(b) Enter into a
financing contract in the amount of $35,656,000 plus financing expenses and
required reserves pursuant to chapter 39.94 RCW, to purchase two existing
office buildings and associated land in Tacoma for use by the department of social
and health services.

(c) Enter into a
financing contract for an amount approved by the office of financial management
for costs and financing expenses and required reserves pursuant to chapter
39.94 RCW to lease develop or lease purchase a state office building of 150,000
to 200,000 square feet on state-owned property in Tumwater according to the
terms of the agreement with the Port of Olympia when the property was acquired
or within the preferred development/leasing areas in Thurston county. The building
shall be constructed and financed so that agency occupancy costs will not
exceed comparable private market rental rates. The comparable general office
space rate shall be calculated based on the three latest Thurston county leases
of new space of at least 100,000 rentable square feet adjusted for inflation as
determined by the department of general administration. The department of
general administration shall coordinate with potential state agency tenants
whose current lease expire near the time of occupancy so that buyout of current
leases do not add to state expense. The office of financial management shall
certify to the state treasurer: (i) The project description and dollar amount;
and (ii) that all requirements of this subsection (2)(c) have been met.

(3) Military
department:

(a) Enter into a
financing contract in the amount of $653,000 plus financing expenses and
required reserves pursuant to chapter 39.94 RCW to construct additional space
at the Spokane combined public safety training center.

(b) Enter into a
financing contract in the amount of $807,000 plus financing expenses and
required reserves pursuant to chapter 39.94 RCW to construct additional space
at the Bremerton readiness center.

(4) Department of
corrections:

Enter into a financing
contract in the amount of $4,588,000 plus financing expenses and required
reserves pursuant to chapter 39.94 RCW to purchase or construct a correctional
industries transportation services warehouse.

(5) Department of
veterans affairs:

(a) Enter into a
financing contract in the amount of $12,000,000 plus financing expenses and
required reserves pursuant to chapter 39.94 RCW to construct a skilled nursing
home in Retsil.

(b) Enter into a
financing contract in an amount not to exceed $5,000,000 plus financing
expenses and required reserves pursuant to chapter 39.94 RCW to purchase a
state veterans' home in eastern Washington.

(6) State parks and
recreation: It is the intent of the legislature that the operating revenues of
the department provide the primary source of funds necessary to meet financing
contract obligations for the projects financed under this authority. In
addition, state parks and recreation is authorized to pledge to make payments
from appropriated funds pursuant to chapter 39.94 RCW in order to:

(a) Enter into
financing contracts in the amount of $1,500,000 plus financing expenses and
required reserves pursuant to chapter 39.94 RCW to purchase and install cabins
and yurts statewide.

(b) Enter into a
financing contract in an amount not to exceed $2,500,000 plus financing
expenses and required reserves pursuant to chapter 39.94 RCW for development of
a multi-purpose dining and meeting facility at Fort Worden state park.

(c) Enter into a
financing contract in an amount not to exceed $750,000 plus financing expenses
and required reserves pursuant to chapter 39.94 RCW for development of an
expansion park at Grayland Beach state park.

(7) Community and
technical colleges:

(a) Enter into a
financing contract on behalf of Edmonds Community College in the amount of
$4,106,300 plus financing expenses and reserves pursuant to chapter 39.94 RCW
to renovate Lynnwood hall and Montlake Terrace hall.

(b) Enter into a
financing contract on behalf of Edmonds Community College in the amount of $3,134,900
plus financing expenses and reserves pursuant to chapter 39.94 RCW to construct
an addition to the student center building.

(c) Enter into a
financing contract on behalf of Highline Community College in the amount of
$15,006,000 plus financing expenses and required reserves pursuant to chapter
39.94 RCW to replace the student union building.

(d) Enter into a
financing contract on behalf of Lower Columbia College in the amount of
$2,000,000 plus financing expenses and required reserves pursuant to chapter
39.94 RCW for up to $2,500,000 to purchase the maple terrace apartments.

(e) Enter into a
financing contract on behalf of Everett Community College in the amount of
$1,500,000 plus financing expenses and required reserves pursuant to chapter
39.94 RCW for remodeling of the fitness center.

(f) Enter into a
financing contract on behalf of Wenatchee Valley College in the amount of
$500,000 plus financing expenses and required reserves pursuant to chapter
39.94 RCW to purchase two buildings and property contiguous to the college
campus.

(g) Enter into a
financing contract on behalf of Olympic College in the amount of $900,000 plus
financing expenses and required reserves pursuant to chapter 39.94 RCW for
development of off-street student parking.

(h) Enter into a
financing contract on behalf of Renton Technical College in the amount of
$1,000,000 plus financing expenses and required reserves pursuant to chapter
39.94 RCW for the purchase of approximately ten acres within the district
boundary to support a future relocation of apprenticeship programs off the main
campus.

(8) Central Washington
University: Enter into a financing contract in the amount of $5,700,000 plus
financing expenses and required reserves pursuant to chapter 39.94 RCW for the
Central Washington University/Edmonds Community College center.

(9) University of
Washington:

(a) Enter into a
financing contract in the amount of $7,500,000 plus financing expenses and
required reserves pursuant to chapter 39.94 RCW for renovation of Sand Point
building 5.

(b) Enter into a
financing contract in the amount of $5,500,000 plus financing expenses and
required reserves pursuant to chapter 39.94 RCW for renovation of Sand Point
building 29.

(c) Enter into a
financing contract in the amount of $1,600,000 plus financing expenses and
required reserves pursuant to chapter 39.94 RCW to complete renovation of Sand
Point building 5.

(10) The Evergreen
State College: Enter into a financing contract in the amount of $1,610,000
plus financing expenses and required reserves pursuant to chapter 39.94 RCW for
expansion of the campus children's center.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
143. The following acts or
parts of acts are each repealed:

(1) 2001 2nd sp.s. c 8 s 184
(uncodified);

(2) 2001 2nd sp.s. c 8 s 186
(uncodified);

(3) 2001 2nd sp.s. c 8 s 187
(uncodified); and

(4) 2001 2nd sp.s. c 8 s 421
(uncodified).

PART
2

JOB CREATION AND INFRASTRUCTURE
PROGRAM

NEW SECTION. Sec.
201. The governor and
legislature find that the state of Washington is faced with a serious economic
downturn following the tragic events of September 11, 2001, and that creating
jobs through capital construction will help stabilize and strengthen the
state's long-term economy. The dollar amounts specified in this Part 2 are
appropriated and authorized to be incurred for capital projects during the
period ending June 30, 2003, for the purposes of stimulating the state economy
through state construction projects. Except where otherwise stated, the
appropriations for the job creation and infrastructure program shall be
expended for direct costs of those projects.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
202. FOR THE OFFICE OF FINANCIAL
MANAGEMENT

Job Creation and
Infrastructure Projects Pool (03-1-001)

The appropriations in
this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations:

(1) The office of
financial management may allocate a portion of these appropriations to agencies
or institutions for limited indirect agency costs and/or project management
costs for the job creation and infrastructure program.

(2) The office of
financial management may allocate a portion of these appropriations for
additional repair, renewal, and infrastructure projects.

Appropriation:

Educational Capital
Construction Account‑-State. $ 3,068,000

State Building
Construction Account‑-State...... $ 4,856,000

Subtotal
Appropriation................... $ 7,924,000

Prior Biennia
(Expenditures).................... $ 0

Future Biennia
(Projected Costs)................ $ 0

TOTAL.................................... $ 7,924,000

NEW SECTION. Sec.
203. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF GENERAL
ADMINISTRATION

Job Creation and
Infrastructure Projects (03-1-001)

Appropriation:

State Building
Construction Account‑-State...... $ 1,950,000

Prior Biennia
(Expenditures).................... $ 0

Future Biennia
(Projected Costs)................ $ 0

TOTAL.................................... $ 1,950,000

NEW SECTION. Sec.
204. FOR THE WASHINGTON STATE PATROL

Job Creation and
Infrastructure Projects (03-1-001)

Appropriation:

State Building
Construction Account‑-State...... $ 250,000

Prior Biennia
(Expenditures).................... $ 0

Future Biennia
(Projected Costs)................ $ 0

TOTAL.................................... $ 250,000

NEW SECTION. Sec.
205. FOR THE MILITARY DEPARTMENT

Job Creation and
Infrastructure Projects (03-1-001)

Appropriation:

State Building
Construction Account‑-State...... $ 2,150,000

Prior Biennia
(Expenditures).................... $ 0

Future Biennia
(Projected Costs)................ $ 0

TOTAL.................................... $ 2,150,000

NEW SECTION. Sec.
206. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF SOCIAL AND
HEALTH SERVICES

Job Creation and
Infrastructure Projects (03-1-001)

Appropriation:

State Building
Construction Account‑-State...... $ 3,070,000

Prior Biennia
(Expenditures).................... $ 0

Future Biennia
(Projected Costs)................ $ 0

TOTAL.................................... $ 3,070,000

NEW SECTION. Sec.
207. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF
CORRECTIONS

Job Creation and
Infrastructure Projects (03-1-001)

Appropriation:

State Building
Construction Account‑-State...... $ 4,028,800

Prior Biennia
(Expenditures).................... $ 0

Future Biennia (Projected
Costs)................ $ 0

TOTAL.................................... $ 4,028,800

NEW SECTION. Sec.
208. FOR THE UNIVERSITY OF WASHINGTON

Job Creation and
Infrastructure Projects (03-1-001)

Appropriation:

Educational Capital
Construction Account‑-State. $ 6,000,000

Prior Biennia
(Expenditures).................... $ 0

Future Biennia
(Projected Costs)................ $ 0

TOTAL.................................... $ 6,000,000

NEW SECTION. Sec.
209. FOR WASHINGTON STATE
UNIVERSITY

Job Creation and
Infrastructure Projects (03-1-001)

Appropriation:

Educational Capital
Construction Account‑-State. $ 6,058,000

Prior Biennia
(Expenditures).................... $ 0

Future Biennia
(Projected Costs)................ $ 0

TOTAL................................ ... $ 6,058,000

NEW SECTION. Sec.
210. FOR EASTERN WASHINGTON
UNIVERSITY

Job Creation and
Infrastructure Projects (03-1-002)

Appropriation:

Educational Capital
Construction Account‑-State. $ 6,424,400

Prior Biennia
(Expenditures).................... $ 0

Future Biennia
(Projected Costs)................ $ 0

TOTAL.................................... $ 6,424,400

NEW SECTION. Sec.
211. FOR CENTRAL WASHINGTON
UNIVERSITY

Job Creation and
Infrastructure Projects (03-1-001)

Appropriation:

Educational Capital
Construction Account‑-State. $ 5,000,000

Prior Biennia
(Expenditures).................... $ 0

Future Biennia
(Projected Costs)................ $ 0

TOTAL.................................... $ 5,000,000

NEW SECTION. Sec.
212. FOR THE EVERGREEN STATE
COLLEGE

Job Creation and
Infrastructure Projects (03-1-001)

Appropriation:

Educational Capital
Construction Account‑-State. $ 3,475,500

Prior Biennia (Expenditures).................... $ 0

Future Biennia
(Projected Costs)................ $ 0

TOTAL.................................... $ 3,475,500

NEW SECTION. Sec.
213. FOR WESTERN WASHINGTON
UNIVERSITY

Job Creation and
Infrastructure Projects (03-1-001)

Appropriation:

Educational Capital
Construction Account‑-State. $ 5,854,000

Prior Biennia
(Expenditures).................... $ 0

Future Biennia
(Projected Costs)................ $ 0

TOTAL.................................... $ 5,854,000

NEW SECTION. Sec.
214. FOR THE STATE PARKS AND
RECREATION COMMISSION

Job Creation and
Infrastructure Projects (03-1-001)

Appropriation:

State Building
Construction Account‑-State...... $ 12,495,000

Prior Biennia
(Expenditures).................... $ 0

Future Biennia
(Projected Costs)................ $ 0

TOTAL.................................... $ 12,495,000

NEW SECTION. Sec.
215. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF FISH AND
WILDLIFE

Job Creation and
Infrastructure Projects (03-1-001)

Appropriation:

State Building
Construction Account‑-State...... $ 11,200,000

Prior Biennia
(Expenditures).................... $ 0

Future Biennia
(Projected Costs)................ $ 0

TOTAL.................................... $ 11,200,000

NEW SECTION. Sec.
216. FOR THE COMMUNITY AND TECHNICAL
COLLEGE SYSTEM

Job Creation and
Infrastructure Projects (03-1-001)

Appropriation:

Educational Capital
Construction Account‑-State. $ 24,228,200

Prior Biennia
(Expenditures).................... $ 0

Future Biennia
(Projected Costs)................ $ 0

TOTAL.................................... $ 24,228,200

Sec. 217. 2001 2nd sp.s. c 8 s 415
(uncodified) is amended to read as follows:

FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF NATURAL
RESOURCES

Trust Land Transfer
Program (02‑2‑010)

The state building
construction account and the educational capital construction account
appropriations in this section ((is)) are subject to the following
conditions and limitations:

(1) The total
appropriation is provided to the department solely to transfer from trust
status or enter into thirty-year timber harvest restrictive easements for
certain trust lands of state-wide significance deemed appropriate for state
park, fish and wildlife habitat, natural area preserve, natural resources
conservation area, open space, or recreation purposes.

(2) Property
transferred under this section shall be appraised and transferred at fair
market value. The value of the timber transferred shall be deposited by the
department to the common school construction account in the same manner as
timber revenues from other common school trust lands. No deduction shall be
made for the resource management cost account under RCW 79.64.040. The value
of the land transferred shall be deposited in the natural resources real
property replacement account. These funds shall be expended by the department
for the exclusive purpose of acquiring real property of equal value to be
managed as common school trust land.

(3) Property subject to
easement agreements under this section shall be appraised at fair market value
both with and without the imposition of the easement. The entire difference in
appraised value shall be deposited by the department to the common school
construction fund in the same manner as lease revenues from other common school
trust lands. No deduction shall be made for the resource management cost
account under RCW 79.64.040.

(4) All reasonable
costs incurred by the department to implement this section are authorized to be
paid out of this appropriation. Authorized costs include the actual cost of
appraisals, staff time, environmental reviews, surveys, and other similar
costs.

(5) Intergrant
exchanges between common school and other trust lands of equal value may occur
if the exchange is in the interest of each trust, as determined by the board of
natural resources.

(6) Prior to or
concurrent with conveyance of these properties, the department, with full cooperation
of the receiving agencies, shall execute and record a real property instrument
that dedicates the transferred properties to the purposes identified in
subsection (1) of this section for a minimum period of thirty years. The
department of natural resources, in consultation with the receiving state
agencies, shall develop policy to address requests to replace transferred
properties subject to the recorded property instrument that are no longer
deemed appropriate for the purposes identified in subsection (1) of this
section.

(7) The department and
receiving agencies shall work in good faith to carry out the intent of this
section. However, the department or receiving agencies may remove a property
from the transfer list based on new, substantive information, if it is
determined that transfer of the property is not in the statewide interest of
either the common school trust or the receiving agency.

(8) The department
shall execute trust land transfers and easements such that ((80 percent of
the)) all of the educational capital construction account
appropriation in this section is deposited in the common school construction
fund. To achieve the 80:20 ratio between the educational capital
construction account appropriation for timber, and the state building
construction account appropriation for land, the department may offset
transfers of property with low timber-to-land ratios with easements on other
properties.

(9) On June 30, 2003,
the state treasurer shall transfer all remaining uncommitted funds from ((this))
these appropriations to the common school construction fund and
the appropriations in this section shall be reduced by an equivalent
amount.

(10) The appropriations
in this section ((is)) are provided for a list of projects in
LEAP capital document No. 2001-42, as developed on June 7, 2001.

Appropriation:

State Building
Construction Account‑‑State. $ ((50,000,000))

10,000,000

Educational Capital
Construction Account‑-

State............................... $ 40,000,000

Natural Resources Real
Property Replacement

Account‑-State........................... $ 10,000,000

Subtotal
Appropriation................... $ 60,000,000

Prior Biennia
(Expenditures).................... $ 66,000,000

Future Biennia
(Projected Costs)................ $ 320,000,000

TOTAL.................................... $ 446,000,000

NEW SECTION. Sec.
218. Agencies shall expedite
the expenditure of appropriations for the job creation and infrastructure
program in order to: (1) Maximize additional private employment opportunities
associated with capital expenditures; (2) expediently renew and repair a wide
variety of state facilities and infrastructure; and (3) minimize
reappropriations for work under this section to those projects that have been
encumbered and are substantially underway by June 30, 2003. Agencies shall
implement the job creation and infrastructure program within the agency's
current level of employees.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
219. The following conditions
apply to appropriations for the job creation and infrastructure program: (1)
Agencies shall contract permitting, design, and construction services wherever
appropriate; (2) the department of general administration shall coordinate
contract and project management services to meet the completion goals of this
section; (3) agencies may petition the office of financial management to use
agency staff or to separately contract project management services for
individual projects on an exception basis by demonstrating that this approach
is more cost effective and necessary to meet the timeline goals in this
section; and (4) to carry out the provisions of sections 201 through 224 of
this act, the office of financial management may assign responsibility for
design, construction, and other related activities to any appropriate agency.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
220. To ensure that job
creation and infrastructure program appropriations are carried out in
accordance with legislative intent, funds shall not be allotted until project
lists are approved by and on file with the office of financial management. Allotments
for appropriations shall be provided in accordance with the capital project
review requirements adopted by the office of financial management. No
expenditure may be incurred or obligation assumed against job creation and
infrastructure program appropriations until the office of financial management
has approved the allotment of the funds to be expended.

The office of financial
management shall report the following information to the appropriate fiscal
committees of the legislature by December 1, 2002: (1) A list of projects by
agency that are funded for job creation and infrastructure improvement; (2) a
status report on each project noting percent completion; and (3) an explanation
of why any appropriation remains unexpended. Agencies shall make this
information available to the office of financial management upon request.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
221. The office of financial
management shall establish a process to monitor the progress of the projects
that received appropriations in the job creation and infrastructure program and
may subsequently redirect any unencumbered funds from projects whose timelines
are not being met to finance other projects in any other agency.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
222. A supplemental capital
budget is hereby adopted and, subject to the provisions set forth in this act,
the several dollar amounts herein specified, or so much thereof as shall be
sufficient to accomplish the purposes designated, are hereby appropriated and
authorized to be incurred for capital projects during the period ending June
30, 2003, out of the several funds specified in this act.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
223. If any provision of this
act or its application to any person or circumstance is held invalid, the
remainder of the act or the application of the provision to other persons or
circumstances is not affected.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 224. This act is necessary for
the immediate preservation of the public peace, health, or safety, or support
of the state government and its existing public institutions, and takes effect
immediately.

---
END ---