BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF
WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1. RCW 9A.56.200 and 1975
1st ex.s. c 260 s 9A.56.200 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) A person is guilty
of robbery in the first degree if:

(a) In the
commission of a robbery or of immediate flight therefrom, he or she:

(((a))) (i)
Is armed with a deadly weapon; or

(((b))) (ii)
Displays what appears to be a firearm or other deadly weapon; or

(((c))) (iii)
Inflicts bodily injury; or

(b) He or she
commits a robbery within and against a financial institution as defined in RCW
7.88.010 or 35.38.060.

(2)
Robbery in the first degree is a class A felony.

--- END ---