BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF
WASHINGTON:

PART 1

NEW SECTION. Sec.
101. It is the intent of the
legislature to consolidate disciplinary procedures for the licensed businesses
and professions under the business and professions division of the department
of licensing by providing a uniform disciplinary act for businesses and professions
with standardized procedures for the regulation of businesses and professions
and the enforcement of laws, the purpose of which is to assure the public of
the adequacy of business and professional competence and conduct.

It is also the intent of
the legislature that all businesses and professions newly credentialed by the
state and regulated by the business and professions division of the department
of licensing come under this chapter.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
102. The definitions in this
section apply throughout this chapter unless the context clearly requires
otherwise.

(1) "Board"
means those boards specified in section 103(2)(b) of this act.

(2)
"Department" means the department of licensing.

(3)
"Director" means the director of the department or director's
designee.

(4) "Disciplinary
action" means sanctions identified in section 112 of this act.

(5) "Disciplinary
authority" means the director, board, or commission having the authority
to take disciplinary action against a holder of, or applicant for, a
professional or business license upon a finding of a violation of this chapter
or a chapter specified under section 103 of this act.

(6)
"License," "licensing," and "licensure" are
deemed equivalent to the terms "license," "licensing,"
"licensure," "certificate," "certification," and
"registration" as those terms are defined in RCW 18.118.020. Each of
these terms, and the term "appointment" under chapter 42.44 RCW, are
interchangeable under the provisions of this chapter.

(7) "Unlicensed
practice" means:

(a) Practicing a
profession or operating a business identified in section 103 of this act
without holding a valid, unexpired, unrevoked, and unsuspended license to do
so; or

(b) Representing to a
consumer, through offerings, advertisements, or use of a professional title or
designation, that the individual or business is qualified to practice a
profession or operate a business identified in section 103 of this act without
holding a valid, unexpired, unrevoked, and unsuspended license to do so.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
103. (1) This chapter applies
only to the director and the boards and commissions having jurisdiction in
relation to the businesses and professions licensed under the chapters specified
in this section. This chapter does not apply to any business or profession not
licensed under the chapters specified in this section.

(2)(a) The director has
authority under this chapter in relation to the following businesses and
professions:

(i) Auctioneers under
chapter 18.11 RCW;

(ii) Bail bond agents
under chapter 18.185 RCW;

(iii) Camping resorts'
operators and salespersons under chapter 19.105 RCW;

(iv) Commercial
telephone solicitors under chapter 19.158 RCW;

(v) Cosmetologists, barbers,
manicurists, and estheticians under chapter 18.16 RCW;

(vi) Court reporters
under chapter 18.145 RCW;

(vii) Employment
agencies under chapter 19.31 RCW;

(viii) For hire vehicle
operators under chapter 46.72 RCW;

(ix) Limousines under
chapter 46.72A RCW;

(x) Notaries public
under chapter 42.44 RCW;

(xi) Private
investigators under chapter 18.165 RCW;

(xii) Professional
boxing, martial arts, and wrestling under chapter 67.08 RCW;

(xiii) Real estate
appraisers under chapter 18.140 RCW;

(xiv) Real estate
brokers and salespersons under chapters 18.85 and 18.86 RCW;

(xv) Security guards
under chapter 18.170 RCW;

(xvi) Sellers of travel
under chapter 19.138 RCW;

(xvii) Timeshares and
timeshare salespersons under chapter 64.36 RCW; and

(xviii) Whitewater
river outfitters under chapter 79A.60 RCW.

(b) The boards and
commissions having authority under this chapter are as follows:

(i) The state board of
registration for architects established in chapter 18.08 RCW;

(ii) The cemetery board
established in chapter 68.05 RCW;

(iii) The Washington
state collection agency board established in chapter 19.16 RCW;

(iv) The state board of
registration for professional engineers and land surveyors established in
chapter 18.43 RCW governing licenses issued under chapters 18.43 and 18.210
RCW;

(v) The state board of
funeral directors and embalmers established in chapter 18.39 RCW;

(vi) The state board of
registration for landscape architects established in chapter 18.96 RCW; and

(vii) The state
geologist licensing board established in chapter 18.220 RCW.

(3) In addition to the
authority to discipline license holders, the disciplinary authority may grant
or deny licenses based on the conditions and criteria established in this chapter
and the chapters specified in subsection (2) of this section. This chapter
also governs any investigation, hearing, or proceeding relating to denial of
licensure or issuance of a license conditioned on the applicant's compliance
with an order entered under section 112 of this act by the disciplinary
authority.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
104. The disciplinary
authority has the power to:

(1) Adopt, amend, and
rescind rules as necessary to carry out the purposes of this chapter, including,
but not limited to, rules regarding standards of professional conduct and
practice;

(2) Investigate
complaints or reports of unprofessional conduct and hold hearings as provided
in this chapter;

(3) Issue subpoenas and
administer oaths in connection with any investigation, hearing, or proceeding
held under this chapter;

(4) Take or cause
depositions to be taken and use other discovery procedures as needed in an
investigation, hearing, or proceeding held under this chapter;

(5) Compel attendance
of witnesses at hearings;

(6) Conduct practice
reviews in the course of investigating a complaint or report of unprofessional
conduct, unless the disciplinary authority is authorized to audit or inspect
applicants or licensees under the chapters specified in section 103 of this
act;

(7) Take emergency
action ordering summary suspension of a license, or restriction or limitation
of the licensee's practice or business pending proceedings by the disciplinary
authority;

(8) Appoint a presiding
officer or authorize the office of administrative hearings, as provided in
chapter 34.12 RCW, to conduct hearings. The disciplinary authority may make
the final decision regarding disposition of the license unless the disciplinary
authority elects to delegate, in writing, the final decision to the presiding
officer;

(9) Use individual
members of the boards and commissions to direct investigations. However, the
member of the board or commission may not subsequently participate in the
hearing of the case;

(10) Enter into
contracts for professional services determined to be necessary for adequate
enforcement of this chapter;

(11) Grant or deny
license applications, secure the return of a license obtained through the
mistake or inadvertence of the department or the disciplinary authority after
providing the person so licensed with an opportunity for an adjudicative
proceeding, and, in the event of a finding of unprofessional conduct by an
applicant or license holder, impose any sanction against a license applicant or
license holder provided by this chapter;

(12) Designate
individuals authorized to sign subpoenas and statements of charges;

(13) Establish panels
consisting of three or more members of the board or commission to perform any
duty or authority within the board's or commission's jurisdiction under this
chapter; and

(14) Contract with
licensees, registrants, endorsement or permit holders, or any other persons or
organizations to provide services necessary for the monitoring or supervision
of licensees, registrants, or endorsement or permit holders who are placed on
probation, whose professional or business activities are restricted, or who are
for an authorized purpose subject to monitoring by the disciplinary authority.
If the subject licensee, registrant, or endorsement or permit holders may only
practice or operate a business under the supervision of another licensee,
registrant, or endorsement or permit holder under the terms of the law
regulating that occupation or business, the supervising licensee, registrant,
or endorsement or permit holder must consent to the monitoring or supervision
under this subsection, unless the supervising licensee, registrant, or
endorsement or permit holder is, at the time, the subject of a disciplinary
order.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
105. In addition to the
authority specified in section 104 of this act, the director has the following
additional authority:

(1) To employ
investigative, administrative, and clerical staff as necessary for the
enforcement of this chapter, except as provided otherwise by statute;

(2) Upon request of a
board or commission, to appoint not more than three pro tem members as provided
in this subsection. Individuals appointed as pro tem members of a board or
commission must meet the same minimum qualifications as regular members of the
board or commission. While serving as a pro tem board or commission member, a
person so appointed has all the powers, duties, and immunities, and is entitled
to the entitlements, including travel expenses in accordance with RCW 43.03.050
and 43.03.060, of a regular member of the board or commission; and

(3) To establish fees
to be paid for witnesses, expert witnesses, and consultants used in any
investigation or adjudicative proceedings as authorized by RCW 34.05.446.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
106. (1) If the disciplinary
authority determines, upon investigation, that there is reason to believe a
violation of section 114 of this act has occurred, a statement of charge or
charges may be prepared and served upon the license holder or applicant. The statement
of charge or charges must be accompanied by a notice that the license holder or
applicant may request a hearing to contest the charge or charges. The license
holder or applicant must file a request for a hearing with the disciplinary
authority within twenty days after being served the statement of charges. The
failure to request a hearing constitutes a default, whereupon the disciplinary
authority may enter a decision on the facts available to it.

(2) If a hearing is
requested, the time of the hearing must be fixed by the disciplinary authority
as soon as convenient, but the hearing may not be held earlier than thirty days
after service of charges upon the license holder or applicant, unless the
disciplinary authority has issued a summary suspension or summary restriction,
for which a hearing may be held sooner than thirty days after service of
charges.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
107. The procedures governing
adjudicative proceedings before agencies under chapter 34.05 RCW, the
administrative procedure act, govern all hearings before the disciplinary
authority. The disciplinary authority has, in addition to the powers and
duties set forth in this chapter, all of the powers and duties under chapter
34.05 RCW, which include, without limitation, all powers relating to the
administration of oaths, the receipt of evidence, the issuance and enforcing of
subpoenas, and the taking of depositions.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
108. The department shall not
issue a license to any person whose license has been previously denied,
revoked, or suspended by the disciplinary authority for that profession or
business, except in conformity with the terms and conditions of the certificate
or order of denial, revocation, or suspension, or in conformity with any order
of reinstatement issued by the disciplinary authority, or in accordance with
the final judgment in any proceeding for review instituted under this chapter.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
109. An order pursuant to
proceedings authorized by this chapter, after due notice and findings in
accordance with this chapter and chapter 34.05 RCW, or an order of summary
suspension entered under this chapter, takes effect immediately upon its being
served. The order, if appealed to the court, may not be stayed pending the
appeal unless the disciplinary authority or court to which the appeal is taken
enters an order staying the order of the disciplinary authority, which stay
shall provide for terms necessary to protect the public.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
110. An individual who has
been disciplined or whose license has been denied by a disciplinary authority
may appeal the decision as provided in chapter 34.05 RCW.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
111. A person whose license
has been suspended or revoked under this chapter may petition the disciplinary
authority for reinstatement after an interval of time and upon conditions
determined by the disciplinary authority in the order. The disciplinary
authority shall act on the petition in accordance with the adjudicative
proceedings provided under chapter 34.05 RCW and may impose such conditions as
authorized by section 112 of this act. The disciplinary authority may require successful
completion of an examination as condition of reinstatement.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
112. (1) Upon finding
unprofessional conduct, the disciplinary authority may issue an order providing
for one or any combination of the following:

(a) Revocation of the
license;

(b) Suspension of the
license for a fixed or indefinite term;

(c) Restriction or
limitation of the practice;

(d) Satisfactory
completion of a specific program of remedial education or treatment;

(e) Monitoring of the
practice in a manner directed by the disciplinary authority;

(f) Censure or
reprimand;

(g) Compliance with
conditions of probation for a designated period of time;

(h) Payment of a fine
for each violation found by the disciplinary authority, not to exceed five
thousand dollars per violation. The disciplinary authority must consider
aggravating or mitigating circumstances in assessing any fine. Funds received
must be deposited in the related program account;

(i) Denial of an
initial or renewal license application; or

(j) Other corrective
action.

(2) The disciplinary
authority may require reimbursement to the disciplinary authority for the
investigative costs incurred in investigating the matter that resulted in
issuance of an order under this section, but only if any of the sanctions in
subsection (1)(a) through (j) of this section is ordered.

(3) Any of the actions
under this section may be totally or partly stayed by the disciplinary
authority. In determining what action is appropriate, the disciplinary
authority must first consider what sanctions are necessary to protect the
public health, safety, or welfare. Only after these provisions have been made
may the disciplinary authority consider and include in the order requirements
designed to rehabilitate the license holder or applicant. All costs associated
with compliance with orders issued under this section are the obligation of the
license holder or applicant.

(4) The licensee or
applicant may enter into a stipulated disposition of charges that includes one
or more of the sanctions of this section, but only after a statement of charges
has been issued and the licensee has been afforded the opportunity for a
hearing and has elected on the record to forego such a hearing. The
stipulation shall either contain one or more specific findings of
unprofessional conduct or a statement by the licensee acknowledging that
evidence is sufficient to justify one or more specified findings of
unprofessional conduct. The stipulations entered into under this subsection
are considered formal disciplinary action for all purposes.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
113. Where payment of a fine
is required as a result of a disciplinary action under section 107 or 116 of
this act and timely payment is not made as directed in the final order, the
disciplinary authority may enforce the order for payment in the superior court
in the county in which the hearing was held. This right of enforcement is in
addition to any other rights the disciplinary authority may have as to any
licensee ordered to pay a fine but may not be construed to limit a licensee's
ability to seek judicial review under section 110 of this act. In any action
for enforcement of an order of payment of a fine, the disciplinary authority's
order is conclusive proof of the validity of the order of a fine and the terms
of payment.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
114. The following conduct,
acts, or conditions constitute unprofessional conduct for any license holder or
applicant under the jurisdiction of this chapter:

(1) The commission of
any act involving moral turpitude, dishonesty, or corruption relating to the
practice of the person's profession or operation of the person's business,
whether the act constitutes a crime or not. Upon a conviction, however, the
judgment and sentence is conclusive evidence at the ensuing disciplinary
hearing of the guilt of the license holder or applicant of the crime described
in the indictment or information, and of the person's violation of the statute
on which it is based. For the purposes of this section, conviction includes
all instances in which a plea of guilty or nolo contendere is the basis for the
conviction and all proceedings in which the sentence has been deferred or
suspended. Except as specifically provided by law, nothing in this section
abrogates the provisions of chapter 9.96A RCW. However, RCW 9.96A.020 does not
apply to a person who is required to register as a sex offender under RCW
9A.44.130;

(2) Misrepresentation
or concealment of a material fact in obtaining a license or in reinstatement
thereof;

(3) Advertising that is
false, deceptive, or misleading;

(4) Incompetence,
negligence, or malpractice that results in harm or damage to a consumer or that
creates an unreasonable risk that a consumer may be harmed or damaged;

(5) The suspension,
revocation, or restriction of a license to engage in any business or profession
by competent authority in any state, federal, or foreign jurisdiction. A
certified copy of the order, stipulation, or agreement is conclusive evidence
of the revocation, suspension, or restriction;

(6) Failure to
cooperate with the disciplinary authority in the course of an investigation,
audit, or inspection authorized by law by:

(a) Not furnishing any
papers or documents requested by the disciplinary authority;

(b) Not furnishing in
writing an explanation covering the matter contained in a complaint when
requested by the disciplinary authority;

(c) Not responding to a
subpoena issued by the disciplinary authority, whether or not the recipient of
the subpoena is the accused in the proceeding; or

(d) Not providing
authorized access, during regular business hours, to representatives of the
disciplinary authority conducting an investigation, inspection, or audit at
facilities utilized by the license holder or applicant;

(7) Failure to comply
with an order issued by the disciplinary authority;

(8) Violating any
lawful rule made by the disciplinary authority;

(9) Aiding or abetting
an unlicensed person to practice or operate a business or profession when a
license is required;

(10) Practice or operation
of a business or profession beyond the scope of practice or operation as
defined by law or rule;

(11) Misrepresentation
in any aspect of the conduct of the business or profession;

(12) Failure to
adequately supervise or oversee auxiliary staff, whether employees or
contractors, to the extent that consumers may be harmed or damaged;

(13) Conviction of any
gross misdemeanor or felony relating to the practice of the person's profession
or operation of the person's business. For the purposes of this subsection,
conviction includes all instances in which a plea of guilty or nolo contendere
is the basis for conviction and all proceedings in which the sentence has been
deferred or suspended. Except as specifically provided by law, nothing in this
section abrogates the provisions of chapter 9.96A RCW. However, RCW 9.96A.020
does not apply to a person who is required to register as a sex offender under
RCW 9A.44.130; and

(14) Interference with
an investigation or disciplinary action by willful misrepresentation of facts
before the disciplinary authority or its authorized representatives, or by the
use of threats or harassment against any consumer or witness to discourage them
from providing evidence in a disciplinary action or any other legal action, or
by the use of financial inducements to any consumer or witness to prevent or
attempt to prevent him or her from providing evidence in a disciplinary action.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
115. If a person or business
regulated by this chapter violates or fails to comply with a final order issued
under section 114 of this act, the attorney general, any prosecuting attorney,
the director, the board or commission, or any other person may maintain an
action in the name of the state of Washington to enjoin the person from
violating the order or failing to comply with the order. The injunction does
not relieve the offender from criminal prosecution, but the remedy by
injunction is in addition to the liability of the offender to criminal
prosecution and disciplinary action.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
116. (1) The disciplinary
authority may investigate complaints concerning practice by unlicensed persons
of a profession or business for which a license is required by the chapters
specified in section 103 of this act. In the investigation of the complaints,
the director has the same authority as provided the disciplinary authority
under section 104 of this act.

(2) The disciplinary
authority may issue a notice of intent to issue a cease and desist order to any
person whom the disciplinary authority has reason to believe is engaged in the
unlicensed practice of a profession or operation of a business for which a
license is required by the chapters specified in section 103 of this act. The
person to whom such a notice is issued may request an adjudicative proceeding
to contest the allegations. The notice shall include a brief, plain statement
of the alleged unlicensed activities. The request for hearing must be filed
within twenty days after service of the notice of intent to issue a cease and
desist order. The failure to request a hearing constitutes a default,
whereupon the director may enter a permanent cease and desist order, which may
include a civil fine. All proceedings shall be conducted in accordance with
chapter 34.05 RCW.

(3) If the disciplinary
authority makes a final determination that a person has engaged or is engaging
in unlicensed practice, the director may issue a permanent cease and desist
order. In addition, the disciplinary authority may impose a civil fine in an
amount not exceeding one thousand dollars for each day upon which the person
engaged in the unlicensed practice of a profession or operation of a business
for which a license is required by one or more of the chapters specified in
section 103 of this act. The proceeds of such a fine shall be deposited in the
related program account.

(4) If the disciplinary
authority makes a written finding of fact that the public interest will be
irreparably harmed by delay in issuing an order, the disciplinary authority may
issue a temporary cease and desist order. The person receiving a temporary
cease and desist order shall be provided an opportunity for a prompt hearing.
A temporary cease and desist order shall remain in effect until further order
of the disciplinary authority. The failure to request a prompt or regularly
scheduled hearing constitutes a default, whereupon the disciplinary authority
may enter a permanent cease and desist order, which may include a civil fine.

(5) The cease and
desist order is conclusive proof of unlicensed practice and may be enforced
under RCW 7.21.060. This method of enforcement of the cease and desist order
or civil fine may be used in addition to, or as an alternative to, any
provisions for enforcement of agency orders set out in chapter 34.05 RCW.

(6) The attorney
general, a county prosecuting attorney, the director, a board or commission, or
any person may, in accordance with the laws of this state governing
injunctions, maintain an action in the name of the state of Washington to
enjoin any person practicing a profession or business without a license for
which a license is required by the chapters specified in section 103 of this
act. All fees, fines, forfeitures, and penalties collected or assessed by a
court because of a violation of this section shall be deposited in the related
program account.

(7) The civil remedies
in this section do not limit the ability to pursue criminal prosecution as
authorized in any of the acts specified in section 103 of this act nor do the
civil remedies limit any criminal sanctions.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
117. A person or business that
violates an injunction issued under this chapter may be found in contempt of
court under RCW 7.21.010. Upon a finding by a court of competent jurisdiction
that the person or business is in contempt, the court may order any remedial
sanction as authorized by RCW 7.21.030. Further, the court may, in addition to
the remedial sanctions available under RCW 7.21.030, order the person or
business to pay a civil penalty to the state in an amount not to exceed
twenty-five thousand dollars, which shall be deposited in the related program
account. For the purposes of this section, the superior court issuing any
injunction retains jurisdiction and the cause shall be continued, and in such
cases the attorney general acting in the name of the state may petition for the
recovery of civil penalties.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
118. A person who attempts to
obtain, obtains, or attempts to maintain a license by willful misrepresentation
or fraudulent representation is guilty of a gross misdemeanor.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
119. If the disciplinary
authority has reason to believe that a license holder has committed a crime, or
violated the laws of another regulatory body, the disciplinary authority may
notify the attorney general or the county prosecuting attorney in the county in
which the act took place, or other responsible official of the facts known to
the disciplinary authority.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
120. The director, members of
the boards or commissions, or individuals acting on their behalf are immune
from suit in any action, civil or criminal, based on any disciplinary actions
or other official acts performed in the course of their duties.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
121. This chapter does not
affect the use of records, obtained from the director or the disciplinary
authorities, in any existing investigation or action by any public agency. Nor
does this chapter limit any existing exchange of information between the
director or the disciplinary authorities and other public agencies.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
122. (1) This chapter applies
to any conduct, acts, or conditions occurring on or after the effective date of
this section.

(2) This chapter does
not apply to or govern the construction of and disciplinary action for any
conduct, acts, or conditions occurring prior to the effective date of this
section. The conduct, acts, or conditions must be construed and disciplinary
action taken according to the provisions of law existing at the time of the
occurrence in the same manner as if this chapter had not been enacted.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
123. This chapter may be known
and cited as the uniform regulation of business and professions act.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
124. Sections 101 through 123
of this act take effect January 1, 2003.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
125. Sections 101 through 124
of this act constitute a new chapter in Title 18 RCW.

PART 2

Sec. 201. RCW 18.08.340 and 1985 c
37 s 5 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) The board may adopt
such rules under chapter 34.05 RCW as are necessary for the proper performance
of its duties under this chapter.

(2) The director shall employ
an executive secretary subject to approval by the board. ((The director
shall provide such secretarial and administrative support as may be required to
carry out the purposes of this chapter.

(3) The board or the
director may conduct investigations concerning alleged violations of this
chapter. In making such investigations and in all proceedings of the board
under this chapter, the chairman or any member of the board acting in place of
the chairman may administer oaths or affirmations to witnesses appearing before
the board, subpoena witnesses and compel their attendance, and require the
production of books, records, papers, and documents. If any person refuses to
obey a subpoena so issued, or refuses to testify or produce any books, records,
papers, or documents so required to be produced, the board may present its
petition in the superior court of Thurston county or the county in which the
person resides, setting forth the facts, and thereupon the court shall, in a
proper case, enter a suitable order compelling compliance with this chapter and
imposing such other terms and conditions as the court finds equitable.))

Sec. 202. RCW 18.08.380 and 1985 c
37 s 9 are each amended to read as follows:

(((1) The director
may reinstate a certificate of registration to any person or a certificate of
authorization to any corporation or joint stock association whose certificate
has been revoked, if a majority of the board vote in favor of such reissuance,
if the board finds that the circumstances or conditions that brought about the
revocation are not likely to recur and that the person, corporation, or joint
stockholders' association is then sufficiently trustworthy and reliable at the
time reinstatement is sought, and that the best interests of the public will be
served by reinstatement of the registration.

(2))) A new certificate of registration or
certificate of authorization to replace any certificate lost, destroyed, or
mutilated may be issued by the director. A charge, determined as provided in
RCW 43.24.086, shall be made for such issuance.

Sec. 203. RCW 18.08.420 and 1991 c
72 s 2 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) An architect or
architects may organize a corporation formed either as a business corporation
under the provisions of Title 23B RCW or as a professional corporation under
the provisions of chapter 18.100 RCW. For an architect or architects to
practice architecture through a corporation or joint stock association
organized by any person under Title 23B RCW, the corporation or joint stock
association shall file with the board:

(a) The application for
certificate of authorization upon a form to be prescribed by the board and
containing information required to enable the board to determine whether the
corporation is qualified under this chapter to practice architecture in this
state;

(b) Its notices of
incorporation and bylaws and a certified copy of a resolution of the board of
directors of the corporation that designates individuals registered under this
chapter as responsible for the practice of architecture by the corporation in
this state and that provides that full authority to make all final
architectural decisions on behalf of the corporation with respect to work
performed by the corporation in this state shall be granted and delegated by
the board of directors to the individuals designated in the resolution. The
filing of the resolution shall not relieve the corporation of any
responsibility or liability imposed upon it by law or by contract; and

(c) A designation in
writing setting forth the name or names of the person or persons registered
under this chapter who are responsible for the architecture of the firm. If
there is a change in the person or persons responsible for the architecture of
the firm, the changes shall be designated in writing and filed with the board
within thirty days after the effective date of the changes.

(2) Upon the filing
with the board of the application for certificate of authorization, the
certified copy of the resolution, and the information specified in subsection
(1) of this section, the board shall authorize the director to issue to the
corporation a certificate of authorization to practice architecture in this
state upon a determination by the board that:

(a) The bylaws of the
corporation contain provisions that all architectural decisions pertaining to
any project or architectural activities in this state shall be made by the
specified architects responsible for the project or architectural activities,
or other responsible architects under the direction or supervision of the
architects responsible for the project or architectural activities;

(b) The applicant
corporation has the ability to provide, through qualified personnel,
professional services or creative work requiring architectural experience, and
with respect to the architectural services that the corporation undertakes or
offers to undertake, the personnel have the ability to apply special knowledge
to the professional services or creative work such as consultation,
investigation, evaluation, planning, design, and administration of the
construction contract in connection with any public or private structures,
buildings, equipment, processes, works, or projects;

(c) The application for
certificate of authorization contains the professional records of the
designated person or persons who are responsible;

(d) The application for
certificate of authorization states the experience of the corporation, if any,
in furnishing architectural services during the preceding five-year period;

(e) The applicant
corporation meets such other requirements related to professional competence in
the furnishing of architectural services as may be established and promulgated
by the board in furtherance of the purposes of this chapter; and

(f) The applicant
corporation is possessed of the ability and competence to furnish architectural
services in the public interest.

(3) Upon recommendation
of the board to impose action as authorized in section 112 of this act,
the director ((shall refuse to issue or)) may ((suspend or revoke))
impose the recommended action upon a certificate of authorization to a
corporation if the board finds that any of the officers, directors,
incorporators, or the stockholders holding a majority of stock of the
corporation have committed an act prohibited under RCW 18.08.440 or section
114 of this act or have been found personally responsible for misconduct
under subsection (6) or (7) of this section.

(4) In the event a
corporation, organized solely by a group of architects each registered under
this chapter, applies for a certificate of authorization, the board may, in its
discretion, grant a certificate of authorization to that corporation based on a
review of the professional records of such incorporators, in lieu of the
required qualifications set forth in subsections (1) and (2) of this section.
In the event the ownership of such corporation is altered, the corporation
shall apply for a revised certificate of authorization, based upon the
professional records of the owners if exclusively architects, under the
qualifications required by subsections (1) and (2) of this section.

(5) Any corporation
authorized to practice architecture under this chapter, together with its
directors and officers for their own individual acts, are responsible to the
same degree as an individual registered architect and shall conduct their
business without misconduct or malpractice in the practice of architecture as
defined in this chapter.

(6) Any corporation
that has been certified under this chapter and has engaged in the practice of
architecture ((shall)) may have its certificate of authorization
either suspended or revoked by the board if, after a proper hearing, the board
finds that the corporation has committed misconduct or malpractice under RCW
18.08.440 or section 114 of this act. In such a case, any individual
architect registered under this chapter who is involved in such misconduct is
also subject to disciplinary measures provided in this chapter and section
112 of this act.

(7) All plans,
specifications, designs, and reports when issued in connection with work
performed by a corporation under its certificate of authorization shall be
prepared by or under the direction of the designated architects and shall be
signed by and stamped with the official seal of the designated architects in
the corporation authorized under this chapter.

(8) For each certificate
of authorization issued under this section there shall be paid a certification
fee and an annual certification renewal fee as prescribed by the director under
RCW 43.24.086.

(9) This chapter shall
not affect the practice of architecture as a professional service corporation
under chapter 18.100 RCW.

Sec. 204. RCW 18.08.440 and 1985 c
37 s 15 are each amended to read as follows:

The board shall have
the power to impose ((fines on any person practicing architecture in an
amount not to exceed one thousand dollars for each offense and may reprimand a
registrant and may suspend, revoke, or refuse to issue or renew a certificate
of registration or authorization to practice architecture in this state)) any
action listed under section 112 of this act upon the following grounds:

(1) Offering to pay,
paying, or accepting, either directly or indirectly, any substantial gift,
bribe, or other consideration to influence the award of professional work;

(2) Being willfully
untruthful or deceptive in any professional report, statement, or testimony;

(3) ((Having
conviction in any court of any offense involving moral turpitude or fraud;

(4))) Having a financial interest in the bidding for
or the performance of a contract to supply labor or materials for or to
construct a project for which employed or retained as an architect except with
the consent of the client or employer after disclosure of such facts; or
allowing an interest in any business to affect a decision regarding
architectural work for which retained, employed, or called upon to perform;

(((5))) (4)
Signing or permitting a seal to be affixed to any drawings or specifications
that were not prepared or reviewed by the architect or under the architect's
personal supervision by persons subject to the architect's direction and
control; or

(((6) Aiding or
abetting any person not authorized to practice architecture under this chapter;

(7))) (5) Willfully evading or trying
to evade any law, ordinance, code, or regulation governing construction of
buildings((; or

(8) Violating any
provision of this chapter or any regulation adopted under it)).

NEW SECTION. Sec.
205. A new section is added
to chapter 18.08 RCW to read as follows:

The uniform regulation
of business and professions act, chapter 18.--- RCW (sections 101 through 124
of this act), governs unlicensed practice, the issuance and denial of licenses,
and the discipline of licensees under this chapter.

Sec. 206. RCW 18.11.085 and 1987 c
336 s 1 are each amended to read as follows:

Every individual,
before acting as an auctioneer, shall obtain an auctioneer certificate of
registration. To be licensed as an auctioneer, an individual shall meet all of
the following requirements:

(1) Be at least
eighteen years of age or sponsored by a licensed auctioneer.

(2) File with the
department a completed application on a form prescribed by the director.

(3) Show that the
proper tax registration certificate required by RCW 82.32.030 has been obtained
from the department of revenue.

(4) Pay the auctioneer
registration fee required under the agency rules adopted pursuant to this
chapter.

(5) Except as otherwise
provided under RCW 18.11.121, file with the department an auctioneer surety
bond in the amount and form required by RCW 18.11.121 and the agency rules
adopted pursuant to this chapter.

(6) Have no
disqualifications under RCW 18.11.160 or section 114 of this act.

Sec. 207. RCW 18.11.095 and 1987 c
336 s 5 are each amended to read as follows:

Every person, before
operating an auction company as defined in RCW 18.11.050, shall obtain an
auction company certificate of registration.

(1) Except as provided
in subsection (2) of this section, to be licensed as an auction company, a
person shall meet all of the following requirements:

(a) File with the
department a completed application on a form prescribed by the director.

(b) Sign a notarized
statement included on the application form that all auctioneers hired by the
auction company to do business in the state shall be properly registered under
this chapter.

(c) Show that the
proper tax registration certificate required by RCW 82.32.030 has been obtained
from the department of revenue.

(d) Pay the auction
company registration fee required under the agency rules adopted pursuant to
this chapter.

(e) File with the
department an auction company surety bond in the amount and form required by
RCW 18.11.121 and the agency rules adopted pursuant to this chapter.

(f) Have no
disqualifications under RCW 18.11.160 or section 114 of this act.

(2) An auction company
shall not be charged a license fee if it is a sole proprietorship or a
partnership owned by an auctioneer or auctioneers, each of whom is licensed
under this chapter, and if it has in effect a surety bond or bonds or other
security approved by the director in the amount that would otherwise be
required for an auction company to be granted or to retain a license under RCW
18.11.121.

Sec. 208. RCW 18.11.100 and 1986 c
324 s 7 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) Nonresident
auctioneers and auction companies are required to comply with the provisions of
this chapter, chapter 18.--- RCW (sections 101 through 124 of this act),
and the rules of the department as a condition of conducting business in the
state.

(2) The application of
a nonresident under this chapter shall constitute the appointment of the
secretary of state as the applicant's agent upon whom process may be served in
any action or proceeding against the applicant arising out of a transaction or
operation connected with or incidental to the business of an auctioneer or an
auction company.

Sec. 209. RCW 18.11.160 and 1997 c
58 s 814 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) No license shall be
issued by the department to any person who has been convicted of forgery,
embezzlement, obtaining money under false pretenses, extortion, criminal
conspiracy, fraud, theft, receiving stolen goods, unlawful issuance of checks
or drafts, or other similar offense, or to any partnership of which the person
is a member, or to any association or corporation of which the person is an
officer or in which as a stockholder the person has or exercises a controlling
interest either directly or indirectly.

(2) ((The following
shall be grounds for denial, suspension, or revocation of a license, or
imposition of an administrative fine by the department:

(a)
Misrepresentation or concealment of material facts in obtaining a license;

(b))) In addition to the unprofessional conduct
described in section 114 of this act, the director has the authority to take
disciplinary action for any of the following conduct, acts, or conditions:

(a)
Underreporting to the department of sales figures so that the auctioneer or
auction company surety bond is in a lower amount than required by law;

(((c) Revocation of
a license by another state;

(d) Misleading or
false advertising;

(e) A pattern of
substantial misrepresentations related to auctioneering or auction company
business;

(f) Failure to
cooperate with the department in any investigation or disciplinary action;

(g))) (b) Nonpayment of an administrative
fine prior to renewal of a license((;

(h) Aiding an
unlicensed person to practice as an auctioneer or as an auction company)); and

(((i))) (c)
Any other violations of this chapter.

(3) The department
shall immediately suspend the license of a person who has been certified
pursuant to RCW 74.20A.320 by the department of social and health services as a
person who is not in compliance with a support order ((or a residential or
visitation order)). If the person has continued to meet all other
requirements for reinstatement during the suspension, reissuance of the license
shall be automatic upon the department's receipt of a release issued by the
department of social and health services stating that the licensee is in compliance
with the order.

Sec. 210. RCW 18.11.180 and 1986 c
324 s 14 are each amended to read as follows:

It shall be unlawful
for a licensed auctioneer or licensed auction company to pay compensation in
money or otherwise to anyone not licensed under this chapter to render any
service or to do any act forbidden under this chapter to be rendered or
performed except by licensees. The department ((shall)) may fine
any person who violates this section five hundred dollars for the first offense
and one thousand dollars for the second or subsequent offense. Furthermore,
the violation of this section by any licensee shall be, in the discretion of
the department, sufficient cause for ((license suspension or revocation))
taking any actions listed under section 112 of this act.

Sec. 211. RCW 18.11.200 and 1986 c
324 s 16 are each amended to read as follows:

The director shall
adopt rules for the purpose of carrying out and developing this chapter,
including rules governing the conduct of ((investigations and))
inspections ((and the imposition of administrative penalties)).

NEW SECTION. Sec.
212. A new section is added
to chapter 18.11 RCW to read as follows:

The uniform regulation
of business and professions act, chapter 18.--- RCW (sections 101 through 124
of this act), governs unlicensed practice, the issuance and denial of licenses,
and the discipline of licensees under this chapter.

Sec. 213. RCW 18.16.030 and 1991 c
324 s 2 are each amended to read as follows:

In addition to any
other duties imposed by law, including sections 104 and 105 of this act,
the director shall have the following powers and duties:

(1) To set all license,
examination, and renewal fees in accordance with RCW 43.24.086;

(2) To adopt rules
necessary to implement this chapter;

(3) ((To investigate
alleged violations of this chapter and consumer complaints involving the
practice of cosmetology, barbering, esthetics, or manicuring, schools offering
training in these areas, and salons/shops and booth renters offering these
services;

(4) To issue
subpoenas, statements of charges, statements of intent, final orders,
stipulated agreements, and any other legal remedies necessary to enforce this
chapter;

(5) To issue cease
and desist letters and letters of warning for infractions of this chapter;

(6) To conduct all
disciplinary proceedings, impose sanctions, and assess fines for violations of
this chapter or any rules adopted under it;

(7))) To prepare and administer or approve the
preparation and administration of licensing examinations;

(((8))) (4)
To establish minimum safety and sanitation standards for schools,
cosmetologists, barbers, manicurists, estheticians, and salons/shops;

(((9))) (5)
To establish minimum instruction guidelines for the training of students;

(((10))) (6)
To maintain the official department record of applicants and licensees;

(((11) To delegate
in writing to a designee the authority to issue subpoenas, statements of
charges, and any other documents necessary to enforce this chapter;

(12))) (7) To establish by rule the procedures
for an appeal of an examination failure;

(((13) To employ
such administrative, investigative, and clerical staff as needed to implement
this chapter;

(14))) (8) To set license expiration dates and
renewal periods for all licenses consistent with this chapter; and

(((15))) (9)
To make information available to the department of revenue to assist in
collecting taxes from persons required to be licensed under this chapter.

Sec. 214. RCW 18.16.060 and 1991 c
324 s 4 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) The director ((shall
impose a fine of one thousand dollars on)) may take action under
sections 116 and 117 of this act against any person who does any of the
following without first obtaining the license required by this chapter:

(a) Except as provided
in subsection (2) of this section, commercial practice of cosmetology,
barbering, esthetics, manicuring, or instructing;

(b) Instructs in a
school;

(c) Operates a school;
or

(d) Operates a
salon/shop. Each booth renter shall be considered to be operating an independent
salon/shop and shall obtain a separate salon/shop license.

(2) A person licensed
as a cosmetology instructor-operator may engage in the commercial practice of
cosmetology without maintaining a cosmetologist license. A person licensed as
a barbering instructor-operator may engage in the commercial practice of
barbering without maintaining a barber license. A person licensed as a
manicuring instructor-operator may engage in the commercial practice of
manicuring without maintaining a manicurist license. A person licensed as an
esthetician instructor-operator may engage in the commercial practice of
esthetics without maintaining an esthetician license.

Sec. 215. RCW 18.16.150 and 1997 c
178 s 1 are each amended to read as follows:

Schools shall be
audited and inspected by the director or the director's designee for compliance
with this chapter at least once a year. If the director determines that a
licensed school is not maintaining the standards required according to this
chapter, written notice thereof shall be given to the school. A school which
fails to correct these conditions to the satisfaction of the director within a
reasonable time ((shall)) may be subject to penalties imposed
under ((RCW 18.16.210)) section 112 of this act.

Sec. 216. RCW 18.16.175 and 1997 c
178 s 2 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) A salon/shop shall
meet the following minimum requirements:

(a) Maintain an outside
entrance separate from any rooms used for sleeping or residential purposes;

(b) Provide and
maintain for the use of its customers adequate toilet facilities located within
or adjacent to the salon/shop;

(c) Be operated under
the direct supervision of a licensed cosmetologist except that a salon/shop
that is limited to barbering may be directly supervised by a barber, a
salon/shop that is limited to manicuring may be directly supervised by a
manicurist, and a salon/shop that is limited to esthetics may be directly
supervised by an esthetician;

(d) Any room used
wholly or in part as a salon/shop shall not be used for residential purposes,
except that toilet facilities may be used jointly for residential and business
purposes;

(e) Meet the zoning
requirements of the county, city, or town, as appropriate;

(f) Provide for safe
storage and labeling of chemicals used in the practice of cosmetology;

(g) Meet all applicable
local and state fire codes;

(h) Provide proof that
the salon/shop is covered by a public liability insurance policy in an amount
not less than one hundred thousand dollars for combined bodily injury and
property damage liability; and

(i) Other requirements
which the director determines are necessary for safety and sanitation of
salons/shops. The director may consult with the state board of health and the
department of labor and industries in establishing minimum salon/shop safety
requirements.

(2) A salon/shop shall
post the notice to customers described in RCW 18.16.180.

(3) Upon receipt of a
written complaint that a salon/shop has violated any provisions of this chapter,
chapter 18.--- RCW (sections 101 through 124 of this act), or the rules
adopted under ((this)) either chapter, or at least once
every two years, the director or the director's designee shall inspect each
salon/shop. If the director determines that any salon/shop is not in
compliance with this chapter, the director shall send written notice to the
salon/shop. A salon/shop which fails to correct the conditions to the
satisfaction of the director within a reasonable time shall, upon due notice,
be subject to the penalties imposed by the director under ((RCW 18.16.210))
section 112 of this act. The director may enter any salon/shop during
business hours for the purpose of inspection. The director may contract with
health authorities of local governments to conduct the inspections under this
subsection.

(4) A salon/shop,
including a salon/shop operated by a booth renter, shall obtain a certificate
of registration from the department of revenue.

(5) This section does
not prohibit the use of motor homes as mobile salon/shops if the motor home
meets the health and safety standards of this section.

Sec. 217. RCW 18.16.200 and 1991 c
324 s 14 are each amended to read as follows:

Any applicant or
licensee under this chapter may be subject to disciplinary action by the
director if the licensee or applicant:

(1) ((Has been found
guilty of a crime related to the practice of cosmetology, barbering, esthetics,
manicuring, or instructing;

(2) Has made a
material misstatement or omission in connection with an original application or
renewal;

(3) Has engaged in
false or misleading advertising;

(4) Has performed
services in an unsafe or unsanitary manner;

(5) Has aided and
abetted unlicensed activity;

(6))) Has engaged in the commercial practice of
cosmetology, barbering, manicuring, esthetics, or instructed in or operated a
school without first obtaining the license required by this chapter;

(((7))) (2)
Has engaged in the commercial practice of cosmetology in a school;

(((8))) (3)
Has not provided a safe, sanitary, and good moral environment for students and the
public((;

(9) Has not provided
records as required by this chapter;

(10) Has not
cooperated with the department in supplying records or assisting in an
investigation or disciplinary procedure)); or

(((11))) (4)
Has violated any provision of this chapter or any rule adopted under it.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
218. A new section is added
to chapter 18.16 RCW to read as follows:

The uniform regulation
of business and professions act, chapter 18.--- RCW (sections 101 through 124
of this act), governs unlicensed practice, the issuance and denial of licenses,
and the discipline of licensees under this chapter.

Sec. 219. RCW 18.39.300 and 1989 c
390 s 7 are each amended to read as follows:

In addition to the
grounds for action set forth in ((RCW 18.130.170 and 18.130.180)) section
114 of this act, the board may take the disciplinary action set forth in ((RCW
18.130.160)) section 112 of this act against the funeral
establishment's license, the license of any funeral director and/or the funeral
establishment's certificate of registration, if the licensee or registrant:

(1) Fails to comply
with any provisions of this chapter((, chapter 18.130 RCW,)) or any
proper order or regulation of the board;

(2) Is found by the
board to be in such condition that further execution of prearrangement
contracts could be hazardous to purchasers or beneficiaries and the people of
this state;

(3) Refuses to be
examined, or refuses to submit to examination by the board when required;

(4) Fails to pay the
expense of an examination; or

(5) Is found by the
board after investigation or receipt of reliable information to be managed by
persons who are incompetent or untrustworthy or so lacking in managerial
experience as to make the proposed or continued execution or servicing of
prearrangement funeral service contracts hazardous to purchasers, beneficiaries,
or to the public.

Sec. 220. RCW 18.39.350 and 1989 c
390 s 11 are each amended to read as follows:

Any person who violates
or fails to comply with, or aids or abets any person in the violation of, or
failure to comply with any of the provisions of this chapter is guilty of a
class C felony pursuant to chapter 9A.20 RCW. Any such violation constitutes
an unfair practice under chapter 19.86 RCW and this chapter and conviction
thereunder is grounds for license revocation under this chapter and section
112 of this act. Retail installment contracts under this chapter shall be
governed by chapter 63.14 RCW.

Sec. 221. RCW 18.39.410 and 1994 c
17 s 3 are each amended to read as follows:

((The following
shall constitute unprofessional conduct)) In addition to the
unprofessional conduct described in section 114 of this act, the board may take
disciplinary action and may impose any of the sanctions specified in section
112 of this act for the following conduct, acts, or conditions:

(1) Solicitation of
dead human bodies by a licensee, registrant, endorsement, or permit holder, or
agent, assistant, or employee of the licensee, registrant, endorsement, or
permit holder whether the solicitation occurs after death or while death is
impending. This chapter does not prohibit general advertising or the sale of
prearrangement funeral service contracts;

(2) Solicitation may
include employment of solicitors, payment of commission, bonus, rebate, or any form
of gratuity or payment of a finders fee, referral fee, or other consideration
given for the purpose of obtaining or providing the services for a dead human
body or where death is impending;

(3) Acceptance by a
licensee, registrant, endorsement, or permit holder or other employee of a
funeral establishment of a commission, bonus, rebate, or gratuity in
consideration of directing business to a cemetery, crematory, mausoleum,
columbarium, florist, or other person providing goods and services to the disposition
of dead human bodies;

(4) Using a casket or
part of a casket that has previously been used as a receptacle for, or in
connection with, the burial or other disposition of a dead human body without
the written consent of the person lawfully entitled to control the disposition
of remains of the deceased person in accordance with RCW 68.50.160. This
subsection does not prohibit the use of rental caskets, such as caskets of
which the outer shell portion is rented and the inner insert that contains the
dead human body is purchased and used for the disposition, that are disclosed
as such in the statement of funeral goods and services;

(5) Violation of a
state law, municipal law, or county ordinance or regulation affecting the
handling, custody, care, transportation, or disposition of dead human bodies;

(6) Refusing to
promptly surrender the custody of a dead human body upon the expressed order of
the person lawfully entitled to its custody under RCW 68.50.160;

(7) Selling, or
offering for sale, a share, certificate, or an interest in the business of a
funeral establishment, or in a corporation, firm, or association owning or
operating a funeral establishment that promises or purports to give to
purchasers a right to the services of a licensee, registrant, endorsement, or
permit holder at a charge or cost less than offered or given to the public;

(8) ((The commission
of an act involving moral turpitude, dishonesty, or corruption relating to the
practice of the funeral profession whether or not the act constitutes a crime.
If the act constitutes a crime, conviction in a criminal proceeding is not a
condition precedent to disciplinary action. Upon such a conviction, however,
the judgment and sentence is conclusive evidence at the ensuing disciplinary
hearing of the guilt of the license, registration, endorsement, or permit
holder, or applicant of the crime described in the indictment or information
and of the person's violation of the statute on which it is based. For the
purpose of this section, conviction includes all instances in which a plea of
guilty or nolo contendere is the basis for the conviction in all proceedings in
which the sentence has been deferred or suspended. This section does not
abrogate rights guaranteed under chapter 9.96A RCW;

(9) Misrepresentation
or concealment of a material fact in obtaining a license, registration,
endorsement, or permit or in reinstatement thereof;

(10) All advertising
that is false, fraudulent, or misleading;

(11) Suspension or
revocation or restriction of the individual's license, registration,
endorsement, or permit to practice the profession by competent authority in any
state, federal, or foreign jurisdiction, a certified copy of the order,
stipulation, or agreement being conclusive evidence of the revocation,
suspension, or restriction;

(12))) Violation of any state or federal statute or
administrative ruling relating to funeral practice;

(((13) Failure to
cooperate with the board by:

(a) Not furnishing
any papers or documents;

(b) Not furnishing
in writing a full and complete explanation covering the matters contained in a
complaint filed with the board; or

(c) Not responding
to subpoenas issued by the board whether or not the recipient of the subpoena
is the accused in the proceeding;

(14) Failure to
comply with an order issued by the board or an assurance of discontinuance
entered into with the board;

(15) Aiding or
abetting an unlicensed or unregistered person to practice where a license,
registration, endorsement, or permit is required;

(16) Misrepresentation
or fraud in any aspect of the conduct of funeral practice;

(17) Conviction of a
gross misdemeanor or felony relating to this title. For the purpose of this
subsection, conviction includes all instances in which a plea of guilty or nolo
contendere is the basis for conviction and all proceedings in which the
sentence has been deferred or suspended. This section does not abrogate rights
guaranteed under chapter 9.96A RCW;

(18) Interference
with an investigation or disciplinary proceeding by willful misrepresentation
of facts before the board or its authorized representative or the inspector, or
by the use of threats or harassment against a witness to prevent that witness
from providing evidence in a disciplinary hearing or other legal action;

(19) Diminished
capacity or habitual intemperance in the use of alcohol, controlled substances,
or prescribed drugs that impairs, interferes, or otherwise prevents the proper
performance of licensed, registered, endorsed, or permitted duties or functions;

(20))) (9) Knowingly concealing information
concerning a violation of this title((;

(21) Incompetence or
negligence as a licensee, registrant, endorsement, or permit holder in carrying
out the duties of the profession)).

Sec. 222. RCW 18.39.530 and 1994 c
17 s 15 are each amended to read as follows:

(((1) The director
shall investigate a complaint concerning practice by an unlicensed person for
which a license, registration, endorsement, or permit is required under this chapter.
The director shall issue a cease and desist order to a person after notice and
hearing and upon a determination that the person has violated this subsection.
If the director makes a written finding of fact that the public interest will
be irreparably harmed by delay in issuing an order, the director may issue a
temporary cease and desist order. The cease and desist order does not relieve
the person practicing or operating a business without a license, registration,
permit, or registration from criminal prosecution for the unauthorized practice
or operation, but the remedy of a cease and desist order is in addition to
criminal liability. The cease and desist order is conclusive proof of
unlicensed practice and may be enforced by civil contempt. This method of
enforcement of the cease and desist order may be used in addition to, or as an
alternative to, provisions for enforcement or agency orders under chapter 34.05
RCW.

(2) The attorney
general, a county prosecuting attorney, the director, the board, or a person
may, in accordance with the laws of this state governing injunctions, maintain
an action in the name of this state to enjoin a person practicing a profession
or business for which a license, registration, endorsement, or permit is
required under this chapter without a license, registration, endorsement, or
permit from engaging in the practice or operation of the business until the
required license, registration, endorsement, or permit is secured. However,
the injunction does not relieve the person so practicing or operating a
business without a license, registration, endorsement, or permit from criminal
prosecution for the unauthorized practice or operation, but the remedy by
injunction is in addition to criminal liability.

(3))) Unlicensed practice of a profession or
operation of a business for which a license, registration, endorsement, or
permit is required under this chapter, unless otherwise exempted by law, is a
gross misdemeanor. Fees, fines, forfeitures, and penalties collected or assessed
by a court because of a violation of this section must be remitted to the
board.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
223. A new section is added
to chapter 18.39 RCW to read as follows:

The uniform regulation
of business and professions act, chapter 18.--- RCW (sections 101 through 124
of this act), governs unlicensed practice, the issuance and denial of licenses,
and the discipline of licensees under this chapter.

Sec. 224. RCW 18.43.035 and 1997 c
247 s 2 are each amended to read as follows:

The board may adopt and
amend bylaws establishing its organization and method of operation, including
but not limited to meetings, maintenance of books and records, publication of
reports, code of ethics, and rosters, and adoption and use of a seal. Four
members of the board shall constitute a quorum for the conduct of any business
of the board. The board may employ such persons as are necessary to carry out
its duties under this chapter. It may adopt rules reasonably necessary to
administer the provisions of this chapter. ((It may conduct investigations
concerning alleged violations of this chapter or the rules adopted by the
board. In making such investigations and in all proceedings under RCW
18.43.110, the chairman of the board or any member of the board acting in his
place may administer oaths or affirmations to witnesses appearing before the
board, subpoena witnesses and compel their attendance, and require the
production of books, records, papers and documents. If any person shall refuse
to obey any subpoena so issued, or shall refuse to testify or produce any
books, records, papers or documents so required to be produced, the board may
present its petition to the superior court of the county in which such person
resides, setting forth the facts, and thereupon the court shall, in any proper
case, enter a suitable order compelling compliance with this chapter and
imposing such other terms and conditions as the court may deem equitable.))
The board shall submit to the governor such periodic reports as may be
required. A roster, showing the names and places of business of all registered
professional engineers and land surveyors may be published for distribution,
upon request, to professional engineers and land surveyors registered under
this chapter and to the public.

Sec. 225. RCW 18.43.105 and 1961 c
142 s 4 are each amended to read as follows:

((As used in this
chapter "misconduct or malpractice in the practice of engineering"
shall include but not be limited to the following)) In addition to the
unprofessional conduct described in section 114 of this act, the board may take
disciplinary action for the following conduct, acts, or conditions:

(1) Offering to pay,
paying or accepting, either directly or indirectly, any substantial gift,
bribe, or other consideration to influence the award of professional work;

(2) Being willfully
untruthful or deceptive in any professional report, statement or testimony;

(3) Attempting to
injure falsely or maliciously, directly or indirectly, the professional
reputation, prospects or business of anyone;

(4) Failure to state
separately or to charge separately for professional engineering services or
land surveying where other services or work are also being performed in
connection with the engineering services;

(5) ((Conviction in
any court of any offense involving moral turpitude;

(6))) Violation of any provisions of this chapter;

(((7))) (6)
Conflict of interest‑-Having a financial interest in bidding for or
performance of a contract to supply labor or materials for or to construct a
project for which employed or retained as an engineer except with the consent
of the client or employer after disclosure of such facts; or allowing an
interest in any business to affect a decision regarding engineering work for
which retained, employed, or called upon to perform;

(((8))) (7)
Nondisclosure‑-Failure to promptly disclose to a client or employer any
interest in a business which may compete with or affect the business of the
client or employer;

(((9))) (8)
Unfair competition‑-Reducing a fee quoted for prospective employment or
retainer as an engineer after being informed of the fee quoted by another
engineer for the same employment or retainer;

(((10))) (9)
Improper advertising‑-Soliciting retainer or employment by advertisement
which is undignified, self-laudatory, false or misleading, or which makes or
invites comparison between the advertiser and other engineers;

(((11))) (10)
Committing any other act, or failing to act, which act or failure are
customarily regarded as being contrary to the accepted professional conduct or
standard generally expected of those practicing professional engineering or
land surveying.

Sec. 226. RCW 18.43.110 and 1997 c
247 s 3 are each amended to read as follows:

The board shall have
the exclusive power to ((fine and reprimand)) discipline the
registrant and ((suspend or revoke)) sanction the certificate of
registration of any registrant ((who is found guilty of:

The practice of any
fraud or deceit in obtaining a certificate of registration; or

Any gross
negligence, incompetency, or misconduct in the practice of engineering or land
surveying as a registered engineer or land surveyor)).

Any person may ((prefer))
file a complaint alleging ((fraud, deceit, gross negligence,
incompetency, or misconduct)) unprofessional conduct, as set out in
section 114 of this act and RCW 18.43.105, against any registrant ((and)).
The complaint shall be in writing and shall be sworn to in writing by the
person making the allegation. A registrant against whom a complaint was made
must be immediately informed of such complaint by the board.

((All procedures
related to hearings on such charges shall be in accordance with provisions
relating to adjudicative proceedings in chapter 34.05 RCW, the Administrative
Procedure Act.

If, after such
hearing, a majority of the board vote in favor of finding the violations had
occurred, the board shall revoke or suspend the certificate of registration of
such registered professional engineer or land surveyor.))

The board, for reasons
it deems sufficient, may reissue a certificate of registration to any person
whose certificate has been revoked or suspended, providing a majority of the
board vote in favor of such issuance. A new certificate of registration to
replace any certificate revoked, lost, destroyed, or mutilated may be issued,
subject to the rules of the board, and a charge determined by the director as
provided in RCW 43.24.086 shall be made for such issuance.

((Any person who
shall feel aggrieved by any action of the board in denying or revoking his
certificate of registration may appeal therefrom to the superior court of the
county in which such person resides, and after full hearing, said court shall
make such decree sustaining or revoking the action of the board as it may deem
just and proper.

Fines imposed by the
board shall not exceed one thousand dollars for each offense.))

In
addition to the imposition of ((civil penalties under this section)) disciplinary
action under section 112 of this act, the board may refer violations of
this chapter to the appropriate prosecuting attorney for charges under RCW
18.43.120.

Sec. 227. RCW 18.43.130 and 1997 c
247 s 4 are each amended to read as follows:

This chapter shall not
be construed to prevent or affect:

(1) The practice of any
other legally recognized profession or trade; or

(2) The practice of a
person not a resident and having no established place of business in this
state, practicing or offering to practice herein the profession of engineering
or land surveying, when such practice does not exceed in the aggregate more than
thirty days in any calendar year: PROVIDED, Such person has been determined by
the board to be legally qualified by registration to practice the said
profession in his or her own state or country in which the requirements and
qualifications for obtaining a certificate of registration are not lower than
those specified in this chapter. The person shall request such a determination
by completing an application prescribed by the board and accompanied by a fee
determined by the director. Upon approval of the application, the board shall
issue a permit authorizing temporary practice; or

(3) The practice of a
person not a resident and having no established place of business in this
state, or who has recently become a resident thereof, practicing or offering to
practice herein for more than thirty days in any calendar year the profession
of engineering or land surveying, if he or she shall have filed with the board
an application for a certificate of registration and shall have paid the fee
required by this chapter: PROVIDED, That such person is legally qualified by
registration to practice engineering or land surveying in his or her own state
or country in which the requirements and qualifications of obtaining a
certificate of registration are not lower than those specified in this
chapter. Such practice shall continue only for such time as the board requires
for the consideration of the application for registration; or

(4) The work of an
employee or a subordinate of a person holding a certificate of registration
under this chapter, or an employee of a person practicing lawfully under
provisions of this section: PROVIDED, That such work does not include final
design or decisions and is done under the direct responsibility, checking, and
supervision of a person holding a certificate of registration under this
chapter or a person practicing lawfully under the provisions of this section;
or

(5) The work of a
person rendering engineering or land surveying services to a corporation, as an
employee of such corporation, when such services are rendered in carrying on
the general business of the corporation and such general business does not
consist, either wholly or in part, of the rendering of engineering services to
the general public: PROVIDED, That such corporation employs at least one
person holding a certificate of registration under this chapter or practicing
lawfully under the provisions of this chapter; or

(6) The practice of
officers or employees of the government of the United States while engaged
within the state in the practice of the profession of engineering or land
surveying for the government of the United States; or

(7) Nonresident
engineers employed for the purpose of making engineering examinations; or

(8) The practice of
engineering or land surveying, or both, in this state by a corporation or joint
stock association: PROVIDED, That

(a) The corporation has
filed with the board an application for certificate of authorization upon a
form to be prescribed by the board and containing information required to
enable the board to determine whether such corporation is qualified in
accordance with this chapter to practice engineering or land surveying, or
both, in this state;

(b) For engineering,
the corporation has filed with the board a certified copy of a resolution of
the board of directors of the corporation that shall designate a person holding
a certificate of registration under this chapter as responsible for the
practice of engineering by the corporation in this state and shall provide that
full authority to make all final engineering decisions on behalf of the
corporation with respect to work performed by the corporation in this state
shall be granted and delegated by the board of directors to the person so
designated in the resolution. For land surveying, the corporation has filed
with the board a certified copy of a resolution of the board of directors of
the corporation which shall designate a person holding a certificate of
registration under this chapter as responsible for the practice of land
surveying by the corporation in this state and shall provide full authority to
make all final land surveying decisions on behalf of the corporation with
respect to work performed by the corporation in this state be granted and
delegated by the board of directors to the person so designated in the
resolution. If a corporation offers both engineering and land surveying
services, the board of directors shall designate both a licensed engineer and a
licensed land surveyor. If a person is licensed in both engineering and land
surveying, the person may be designated for both professions. The resolution
shall further state that the bylaws of the corporation shall be amended to
include the following provision: "The designated engineer or land
surveyor, respectively, named in the resolution as being in responsible charge,
or an engineer or land surveyor under the designated engineer or land
surveyor's direct supervision, shall make all engineering or land surveying
decisions pertaining to engineering or land surveying activities in the state
of Washington." However, the filing of the resolution shall not relieve
the corporation of any responsibility or liability imposed upon it by law or by
contract;

(c) If there is a
change in the designated engineer or designated land surveyor, the corporation
shall notify the board in writing within thirty days after the effective date
of the change. If the corporation changes its name, the corporation shall
submit a copy of its amended certificate of authority or amended certificate of
incorporation as filed with the secretary of state within thirty days of the
filing;

(d) Upon the filing
with the board the application for certificate for authorization, certified
copy of resolution and an affidavit, the designation of a designated engineer
or designated land surveyor, or both, specified in (b) of this subsection, a
certificate of incorporation or certificate of authorization as filed with the
secretary of state, and a copy of the corporation's current Washington business
license, the board shall issue to the corporation a certificate of
authorization to practice engineering or land surveying, or both, in this state
upon a determination by the board that:

(i) The designated
engineer or designated land surveyor, or both, hold a certificate of
registration in this state in accordance with this chapter and the certificate
is in force;

(ii) The designated
engineer or designated land surveyor, or both, are not designated in
responsible charge for another corporation or a limited liability company; and

(iii) The corporation
is licensed with the secretary of state and holds a current unified business
identification number and the board determines, based on evaluating the
findings and information in this section, that the applicant corporation
possesses the ability and competence to furnish engineering or land surveying
services, or both, in the public interest.

The board may exercise
its discretion to ((refuse to issue or it may suspend or revoke)) take
any of the actions under section 112 of this act with respect to a
certificate of authorization issued to a corporation if the board finds that
any of the officers, directors, incorporators, or the stockholders holding a
majority of stock of such corporation has ((committed misconduct or
malpractice)) engaged in unprofessional conduct as defined in RCW
18.43.105 or section 114 of this act or has been found personally
responsible for ((misconduct or malpractice)) unprofessional conduct
under (f) and (g) of this subsection.

(e) Engineers or land
surveyors organized as a professional service corporation under chapter 18.100
RCW are exempt from applying for a certificate of authorization under this
chapter.

(f) Any corporation
authorized to practice engineering under this chapter, together with its
directors and officers for their own individual acts, are responsible to the
same degree as an individual registered engineer, and must conduct its business
without ((misconduct or malpractice)) unprofessional conduct in
the practice of engineering as defined in this chapter and section 114 of
this act.

(g) Any corporation
that is certified under this chapter is subject to the authority of the board
as provided in RCW 18.43.035, 18.43.105, 18.43.110, ((and)) 18.43.120,
and chapter 18.--- RCW (sections 101 through 124 of this act).

(h) All plans,
specifications, designs, and reports when issued in connection with work
performed by a corporation under its certificate of authorization shall be
prepared by or under the direct supervision of and shall be signed by and shall
be stamped with the official seal of a person holding a certificate of
registration under this chapter.

(i) For each
certificate of authorization issued under this subsection (8) there shall be
paid an initial fee determined by the director as provided in RCW 43.24.086 and
an annual renewal fee determined by the director as provided in RCW 43.24.086.

(9) The practice of
engineering and/or land surveying in this state by a partnership if the
partnership employs at least one person holding a valid certificate of
registration under this chapter to practice engineering or land surveying, or
both. The board shall not issue certificates of authorization to partnerships
after July 1, 1998. Partnerships currently registered with the board are not
required to pay an annual renewal fee after July 1, 1998.

(10) The practice of
engineering or land surveying, or both, in this state by limited liability
companies: Provided, That

(a) The limited
liability company has filed with the board an application for certificate of
authorization upon a form to be prescribed by the board and containing
information required to enable the board to determine whether the limited
liability company is qualified under this chapter to practice either or both engineering
or land surveying in this state.

(b) The limited
liability company has filed with the board a certified copy of a resolution by
the company manager or managers that shall designate a person holding a
certificate of registration under this chapter as being responsible for the
practice of engineering or land surveying, or both, by the limited liability
company in this state and that the designated person has full authority to make
all final engineering or land surveying decisions on behalf of the limited
liability company with respect to work performed by the limited liability
company in this state. The resolution shall further state that the limited
liability company agreement shall be amended to include the following
provision: "The designated engineer or land surveyor, respectively, named
in the resolution as being in responsible charge, or an engineer or land
surveyor under the designated engineer or land surveyor's direct supervision,
shall make all engineering or land surveying decisions pertaining to
engineering or land surveying activities in the state of Washington."
However, the filing of the resolution shall not relieve the limited liability
company of responsibility or liability imposed upon it by law or by contract.

(c) The designated
engineer for the limited liability company must hold a current professional
engineer license issued by this state.

The designated land
surveyor for the limited liability company must hold a current professional
land surveyor license issued by this state.

If a person is licensed
as both a professional engineer and as a professional land surveyor in this
state, then the limited liability company may designate the person as being in
responsible charge for both professions.

If there is a change in
the designated engineer or designated land surveyor, the limited liability
company shall notify the board in writing within thirty days after the
effective date of the change. If the limited liability company changes its
name, the company shall submit to the board a copy of the certificate of
amendment filed with the secretary of state's office.

(d) Upon the filing
with the board the application for certificate of authorization, a certified
copy of the resolution, an affidavit from the designated engineer or the
designated land surveyor, or both, specified in (b) and (c) of this subsection,
a copy of the certificate of formation as filed with the secretary of state,
and a copy of the company's current business license, the board shall issue to
the limited liability company a certificate of authorization to practice
engineering or land surveying, or both, in this state upon determination by the
board that:

(i) The designated
engineer or designated land surveyor, or both, hold a certificate of registration
in this state under this chapter and the certificate is in force;

(ii) The designated
engineer or designated land surveyor, or both, are not designated in
responsible charge for another limited liability company or a corporation;

(iii) The limited
liability company is licensed with the secretary of state and has a current
unified business identification number and that the board determines, based on
evaluating the findings and information under this subsection, that the
applicant limited liability company possesses the ability and competence to
furnish either or both engineering or land surveying services in the public
interest.

The board may exercise
its discretion to ((refuse to issue, or it may suspend or revoke)) take
any of the actions under section 112 of this act with respect to a
certificate of authorization issued to a limited liability company if the board
finds that any of the managers or members holding a majority interest in the
limited liability company has ((committed misconduct or malpractice)) engaged
in unprofessional conduct as defined in RCW 18.43.105 or section 114 of
this act or has been found personally responsible for ((misconduct or
malpractice)) unprofessional conduct under the provisions of (f) and
(g) of this subsection.

(e) Engineers or land
surveyors organized as a professional limited liability company are exempt from
applying for a certificate of authorization under this chapter.

(f) Any limited
liability company authorized to practice engineering or land surveying, or
both, under this chapter, together with its manager or managers and members for
their own individual acts, are responsible to the same degree as an individual
registered engineer or registered land surveyor, and must conduct their
business without ((misconduct or malpractice)) unprofessional conduct
in the practice of engineering or land surveying, or both.

(g) A limited liability
company that is certified under this chapter is subject to the authority of the
board as provided in RCW 18.43.035, 18.43.105, 18.43.110, ((and))
18.43.120, and chapter 18.--- RCW (sections 101 through 124 of this act).

(h) All plans,
specifications, designs, and reports when issued in connection with work
performed by a limited liability company under its certificate of authorization
shall be prepared by or under the direct supervision of and shall be signed by
and shall be stamped with the official seal of a person holding a certificate
of registration under this chapter.

(i) For each
certificate of authorization issued under this subsection (10) there shall be
paid an initial fee determined by the director as provided in RCW 43.24.086 and
an annual renewal fee determined by the director as provided in RCW 43.24.086.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
228. A new section is added
to chapter 18.43 RCW to read as follows:

The uniform regulation
of business and professions act, chapter 18.--- RCW (sections 101 through 124
of this act), governs unlicensed practice, the issuance and denial of licenses,
and the discipline of licensees under this chapter.

Sec. 229. RCW 18.85.040 and 1992 c
92 s 1 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) The director, with
the advice and approval of the commission, may issue rules and regulations to
govern the activities of real estate brokers, associate real estate brokers and
salespersons, consistent with this chapter and chapter 18.--- RCW (sections
101 through 124 of this act), fix the times and places for holding
examinations of applicants for licenses and prescribe the method of conducting
them.

(2) The director shall
enforce all laws, rules, and regulations relating to the licensing of
real estate brokers, associate real estate brokers, and salespersons, grant or
deny licenses to real estate brokers, associate real estate brokers, and
salespersons, and hold hearings. ((The director may impose any one or more
of the following sanctions: Suspend or revoke licenses, deny applications for
licenses, fine violators, or require the completion of a course in a selected
aspect of real estate practice relevant to the provision of this chapter or
rule violated. The director may deny, suspend or revoke the authority of a
broker to act as the designated broker of persons who commit violations of the
real estate license law or of the rules and regulations.))

(3) The director shall
establish by rule standards for licensure of applicants licensed in other
jurisdictions.

(4) The director shall
institute a program of real estate education including, but not limited to,
instituting a program of education at institutions of higher education in
Washington. The overall program shall include establishing minimum levels of
ongoing education for licensees relating to the practice of real estate by real
estate brokers and salespersons under this chapter. The program may also
include the development or implementation of curricula courses, educational
materials, or approaches to education relating to real estate when required,
approved, or certified for continuing education credit. The director may enter
into contracts with other persons or entities, whether publicly or privately
owned or operated, to assist in developing or implementing the real estate
education program.

(5) The director shall
charge a fee, as prescribed by the director by rule, for the certification of
courses of instruction, instructors, and schools.

Sec. 230. RCW 18.85.230 and 1999 c
46 s 1 are each amended to read as follows:

((The director may,
upon his or her own motion, and shall upon verified complaint in writing by any
person, investigate the actions of)) In addition to the unprofessional
conduct described in section 114 of this act, the director may take
disciplinary action against any person engaged in the business or acting in
the capacity of a real estate broker, associate real estate broker, or real
estate salesperson, regardless of whether the transaction was for his or her
own account or in his or her capacity as broker, associate real estate broker,
or real estate salesperson, and may impose any ((one or more of the
following sanctions: Suspend or revoke, levy a fine not to exceed one thousand
dollars for each offense, require the completion of a course in a selected area
of real estate practice relevant to the section of this chapter or rule
violated, or deny the license)) of the sanctions specified in section
112 of this act for any holder or applicant who is guilty of:

(1) ((Obtaining a
license by means of fraud, misrepresentation, concealment, or through the
mistake or inadvertence of the director;

(2))) Violating any of the provisions of this
chapter or any lawful rules or regulations made by the director pursuant
thereto or violating a provision of chapter 64.36, 19.105, or 58.19 RCW or RCW
18.86.030 or the rules adopted under those chapters or section;

(((3) Being
convicted in a court of competent jurisdiction of this or any other state, or
federal court, of forgery, embezzlement, obtaining money under false pretenses,
bribery, larceny, extortion, conspiracy to defraud, or any similar offense or
offenses: PROVIDED, That for the purposes of this section being convicted
shall include all instances in which a plea of guilty or nolo contendere is the
basis for the conviction, and all proceedings in which the sentence has been
deferred or suspended;

(4))) (2) Making, printing, publishing,
distributing, or causing, authorizing, or knowingly permitting the making,
printing, publication or distribution of false statements, descriptions or
promises of such character as to reasonably induce any person to act thereon,
if the statements, descriptions, or promises purport to be made or to be
performed by either the licensee or his or her principal and the licensee then
knew or, by the exercise of reasonable care and inquiry, could have known, of
the falsity of the statements, descriptions or promises;

(((5))) (3)
Knowingly committing, or being a party to, any material fraud,
misrepresentation, concealment, conspiracy, collusion, trick, scheme, or
device whereby any other person lawfully relies upon the word, representation
or conduct of the licensee;

(((6))) (4)
Accepting the services of, or continuing in a representative capacity, any
associate broker or salesperson who has not been granted a license, or after
his or her license has been revoked or during a suspension thereof;

(((7))) (5)
Conversion of any money, contract, deed, note, mortgage, or abstract or other
evidence of title, to his or her own use or to the use of his or her principal
or of any other person, when delivered to him or her in trust or on condition,
in violation of the trust or before the happening of the condition; and failure
to return any money or contract, deed, note, mortgage, abstract, or
other evidence of title within thirty days after the owner thereof is entitled
thereto, and makes demand therefor, shall be prima facie evidence of such
conversion;

(((8))) (6)
Failing, upon demand, to disclose any information within his or her knowledge
to, or to produce any document, book or record in his or her possession for
inspection of the director or his or her authorized representatives acting by
authority of law;

(((9))) (7)
Continuing to sell any real estate, or operating according to a plan of
selling, whereby the interests of the public are endangered, after the director
has, by order in writing, stated objections thereto;

(((10) Committing
any act of fraudulent or dishonest dealing or a crime involving moral
turpitude, and a certified copy of the final holding of any court of competent
jurisdiction in such matter shall be conclusive evidence in any hearing under
this chapter. However, RCW 9.96A.020 does not apply to a person who is
required to register as a sex offender under RCW 9A.44.130;

(11))) (8) Advertising in any manner without
affixing the broker's name as licensed, and in the case of a salesperson or
associate broker, without affixing the name of the broker as licensed for whom
or under whom the salesperson or associate broker operates, to the
advertisement; except, that a real estate broker, associate real estate broker,
or real estate salesperson advertising their personally owned real property
must only disclose that they hold a real estate license;

(((12))) (9)
Accepting other than cash or its equivalent as earnest money unless that fact
is communicated to the owner prior to his or her acceptance of the offer to
purchase, and such fact is shown in the earnest money receipt;

(((13))) (10)
Charging or accepting compensation from more than one party in any one
transaction without first making full disclosure in writing of all the facts to
all the parties interested in the transaction;

(((14))) (11)
Accepting, taking, or charging any undisclosed commission, rebate,
or direct profit on expenditures made for the principal;

(((15))) (12)
Accepting employment or compensation for appraisal of real property contingent
upon reporting a predetermined value;

(((16))) (13)
Issuing an appraisal report on any real property in which the broker, associate
broker, or salesperson has an interest unless his or her interest is clearly
stated in the appraisal report;

(((17))) (14)
Misrepresentation of his or her membership in any state or national real estate
association;

(((18))) (15)
Discrimination against any person in hiring or in sales activity, on the basis
of any of the provisions of any state or federal antidiscrimination law;

(((19))) (16)
Failing to keep an escrow or trustee account of funds deposited with him or her
relating to a real estate transaction, for a period of three years, showing to
whom paid, and such other pertinent information as the director may require,
such records to be available to the director, or his or her representatives, on
demand, or upon written notice given to the bank;

(((20))) (17)
Failing to preserve for three years following its consummation records relating
to any real estate transaction;

(((21))) (18)
Failing to furnish a copy of any listing, sale, lease or other contract
relevant to a real estate transaction to all signatories thereof at the time of
execution;

(((22))) (19)
Acceptance by a branch manager, associate broker, or salesperson of a
commission or any valuable consideration for the performance of any acts
specified in this chapter, from any person, except the licensed real estate
broker with whom he or she is licensed;

(((23))) (20)
To direct any transaction involving his or her principal, to any lending
institution for financing or to any escrow company, in expectation of receiving
a kickback or rebate therefrom, without first disclosing such expectation to
his or her principal;

(((24))) (21)
Buying, selling, or leasing directly, or through a third party, any interest in
real property without disclosing in writing that he or she holds a real estate
license;

(((25))) (22)
In the case of a broker licensee, failing to exercise adequate supervision over
the activities of his or her licensed associate brokers and salespersons within
the scope of this chapter;

(((26))) (23)
Any conduct in a real estate transaction which demonstrates bad faith,
dishonesty, untrustworthiness, or incompetency;

(((27))) (24)
Acting as a vehicle dealer, as defined in RCW 46.70.011, without having a
license to do so; or

(((28))) (25)
Failing to ((assure)) ensure that the title is transferred under
chapter 46.12 RCW when engaging in a transaction involving a mobile home as a
broker, associate broker, or salesperson((; or

(29)
Violation of an order to cease and desist which is issued by the director under
this chapter)).

Sec. 231. RCW 18.85.261 and 1987 c
332 s 12 are each amended to read as follows:

((If the licensed
person or applicant accused does not appear at the time and place appointed for
the hearing in person or by counsel, the hearing officer may proceed and
determine the facts of the accusation in his or her absence. The proceedings
may be conducted at places within the state convenient to all persons concerned
as determined by the director, and may be adjourned from day to day or for
longer periods.)) The hearing officer shall cause a transcript of all such
proceedings to be kept by a reporter and shall upon request after completion
thereof, furnish a copy of such transcript to the licensed person or applicant
accused in such proceedings at the expense of the licensee or applicant. The
hearing officer shall certify the transcript of proceedings to be true and
correct. If the director finds that the statement or accusation is not proved
by a fair preponderance of evidence, the director shall notify the licensee or
applicant and the person making the accusation and shall dismiss the case.

Sec. 232. RCW 18.85.271 and 1989 c
175 s 66 are each amended to read as follows:

If the director ((shall))
decides, after such hearing, that the evidence supports the accusation
by a preponderance of evidence, the director may impose sanctions authorized
under RCW 18.85.040. In such event the director shall enter an order to that
effect and shall file the same in his or her office and immediately mail a copy
((thereof)) to the affected party at the address of record with the
department. ((Such order shall not be operative for a period of ten days
from the date thereof. Any licensee or applicant aggrieved by a final decision
by the director in an adjudicative proceeding, whether such decision is
affirmative or negative in form, is entitled to a judicial review in the
superior court under the provisions of the Administrative Procedure Act,
chapter 34.05 RCW.)) Upon instituting appeal in the superior court, the
appellant shall give a cash bond to the state of Washington, which bond shall
be filed with the clerk of the court, in the sum of five hundred dollars to be
approved by the judge of said court, conditioned to pay all costs that may be
awarded against such appellant in the event of an adverse decision, such bond
and notice to be filed within thirty days from the date of the director's
decision.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
233. A new section is added
to chapter 18.85 RCW to read as follows:

The uniform
regulation of business and professions act, chapter 18.--- RCW (sections 101
through 124 of this act), governs unlicensed practice, the issuance and denial
of licenses, and the discipline of licensees under this chapter.

Sec. 234. RCW 18.96.060 and 1969
ex.s. c 158 s 6 are each amended to read as follows:

The board shall adopt
rules for its own organization and procedure and such other rules as it may
deem necessary to the proper performance of its duties. Three members of the
board shall constitute a quorum for the conduct of any business of the board.

The board may conduct
hearings concerning alleged violations of the provisions of this chapter. ((In
conducting such hearings the chairman of the board, or any member of the board
acting in his place, may administer oaths or affirmations to witnesses
appearing before the board, subpoena witnesses and compel their attendance, and
require the production of books, records, papers and documents. If any person
shall refuse to obey any subpoena so issued, or shall refuse to testify or to
produce any books, records, papers or documents so required to be produced, the
board may present its petition to the superior court of the county in which
such person resides, setting forth the facts, and thereupon the court shall, in
any proper case, enter a suitable order compelling compliance with the
provisions of this chapter and imposing such other terms and conditions as the
court may deem equitable.))

Sec. 235. RCW 18.96.120 and 1997 c
58 s 827 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) ((The director
may refuse to renew, or may suspend or revoke, a certificate of registration to
use the titles landscape architect, landscape architecture, or landscape architectural
in this state upon the following grounds)) In addition to the conduct,
acts, or conditions set out in section 114 of this act, the following
constitute unprofessional conduct for which the director may impose discipline
upon any license holder or applicant under the jurisdiction of this chapter:

(a) The holder of the
certificate of registration is impersonating a practitioner or former
practitioner.

(b) ((The holder of
the certificate of registration is guilty of fraud, deceit, gross negligence,
gross incompetency or gross misconduct in the practice of landscape
architecture.

(c))) The holder of the certificate of registration
permits his or her seal to be affixed to any plans, specifications,
or drawings that were not prepared by him or her or under his or her
personal supervision by employees subject to his or her direction and
control.

(((d) The holder of
the certificate has committed fraud in applying for or obtaining a certificate.))

(2) The director shall
immediately suspend the certificate of registration of a landscape architect
who has been certified pursuant to RCW 74.20A.320 by the department of social
and health services as a person who is not in compliance with a support order
((or a residential or visitation order)). If the person has continued
to meet all other requirements for certification during the suspension,
reissuance of the certificate of registration shall be automatic upon the
director's receipt of a release issued by the department of social and health
services stating that the person is in compliance with the order.

Sec. 236. RCW 18.96.140 and 1985 c
7 s 77 are each amended to read as follows:

((Upon the
recommendations of the board, the director may restore a license to any person
whose license has been suspended or revoked. Application for the reissuance of
a license shall be made in such a manner as indicated by the board.))

A new certificate of
registration to replace any certificate lost or destroyed, or mutilated may be
issued by the director, and a charge determined by the director as provided in
RCW 43.24.086 shall be made for such issuance.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
237. A new section is added
to chapter 18.96 RCW to read as follows:

The uniform regulation
of business and professions act, chapter 18.--- RCW (sections 101 through 124
of this act), governs unlicensed practice, the issuance and denial of licenses,
and the discipline of licensees under this chapter.

Sec. 238. RCW 18.140.030 and 2000
c 249 s 2 are each amended to read as follows:

The director shall have
the following powers and duties:

(1) To adopt rules in
accordance with chapter 34.05 RCW necessary to implement this chapter and
chapter 18.--- RCW (sections 101 through 124 of this act), with the advice
and approval of the commission;

(2) To receive and
approve or deny applications for certification or licensure as a
state-certified or state-licensed real estate appraiser under this chapter; to
establish appropriate administrative procedures for the processing of such
applications; to issue certificates or licenses to qualified applicants
pursuant to the provisions of this chapter; and to maintain a register of the
names and addresses of individuals who are currently certified or licensed
under this chapter;

(3) To provide
administrative assistance to the members of and to keep records for the real
estate appraiser commission;

(4) To solicit bids and
enter into contracts with educational testing services or organizations for the
preparation of questions and answers for certification or licensure
examinations;

(5) To administer or
contract for administration of certification or licensure examinations at
locations and times as may be required to carry out the responsibilities under
this chapter;

(6) To enter into
contracts for professional services determined to be necessary for adequate
enforcement of this chapter;

(7) To consider
recommendations by the real estate appraiser commission relating to the
experience, education, and examination requirements for each classification of
state-certified appraiser and for licensure;

(8) To consider
recommendations by the real estate appraiser commission relating to continuing
education requirements as a prerequisite to renewal of certification or
licensure;

(9) To consider
recommendations by the real estate appraiser commission relating to standards
of professional appraisal conduct or practice in the enforcement of this
chapter;

(10) ((To
investigate all complaints or reports of unprofessional conduct as defined in
this chapter and to hold hearings as provided in this chapter;

(11) To establish
appropriate administrative procedures for disciplinary proceedings conducted
pursuant to the provisions of this chapter;

(12) To compel the
attendance of witnesses and production of books, documents, records, and other
papers; to administer oaths; and to take testimony and receive evidence
concerning all matters within their jurisdiction. These powers may be
exercised directly by the director or the director's authorized representatives
acting by authority of law;

(13) To take
emergency action ordering summary suspension of a license or certification
pending proceedings by the director;

(14))) To employ such professional, clerical, and
technical assistance as may be necessary to properly administer the work of the
director;

(((15))) (11)
To establish forms necessary to administer this chapter;

(((16))) (12)
To establish an expert review appraiser roster comprised of state-certified or
licensed real estate appraisers whose purpose is to assist the director by
applying their individual expertise by reviewing real estate appraisals for
compliance with this chapter. Qualifications to act as an expert review
appraiser shall be established by the director with the advice of the
commission. An application to serve as an expert review appraiser shall be
submitted to the real estate appraiser program, and the roster of accepted
expert review appraisers shall be maintained by the department. An expert
review appraiser may be added to or deleted from that roster by the director.
The expert review appraiser shall be reimbursed for expenses in the same manner
as the department reimburses the commission; and

(((17)))
(13) To do all other things necessary to carry out the provisions of
this chapter and minimally meet the requirements of federal guidelines
regarding state certification or licensure of appraisers that the director
determines are appropriate for state-certified and state-licensed appraisers in
this state.

Sec. 239. RCW 18.140.160 and 2000
c 35 s 1 are each amended to read as follows:

((The director may
deny an application for licensure or certification and may impose any one or
more of the following sanctions against a state-licensed or state-certified
appraiser: Suspend, revoke, or levy a fine not to exceed one thousand dollars
for each offense and/or otherwise discipline in accordance with the provisions
of this chapter, for any of the following acts or omissions)) In
addition to the unprofessional conduct described in section 114 of this act,
the director may take disciplinary action for the following conduct, acts, or
conditions:

(1) Failing to meet the
minimum qualifications for state licensure or certification established by or
pursuant to this chapter;

(2) ((Procuring or
attempting to procure state licensure or certification under this chapter by
knowingly making a false statement, knowingly submitting false information, or
knowingly making a material misrepresentation on any application filed with the
director;

(3))) Paying money other than the fees provided for
by this chapter to any employee of the director or the ((committee)) commission
to procure state licensure or certification under this chapter;

(((4) Obtaining a
license or certification through the mistake or inadvertence of the director;

(5) Conviction of
any gross misdemeanor or felony or the commission of any act involving moral
turpitude, dishonesty, or corruption whether or not the act constitutes a
crime. If the act constitutes a crime, conviction in a criminal proceeding is
not a condition precedent to disciplinary action. Upon such a conviction,
however, the judgment and sentence is conclusive evidence at the ensuing
disciplinary hearing of the guilt of the license or certificate holder or
applicant of the crime described in the indictment or information, and of the
person's violation of the statute on which it is based. For the purposes of
this section, conviction includes all instances in which a plea of guilty or
nolo contendere is the basis for the conviction and all proceedings in which
the sentence has been deferred or suspended. Nothing in this section abrogates
rights guaranteed under chapter 9.96A RCW. However, RCW 9.96A.020 does not
apply to a person who is required to register as a sex offender under RCW
9A.44.130;

(6) Failure or
refusal without good cause to exercise reasonable diligence in developing an
appraisal, preparing an appraisal report, or communicating an appraisal;

(7) Negligence or
incompetence in developing an appraisal, preparing an appraisal report, or
communicating an appraisal;

(8))) (3) Continuing to act as a
state-licensed or state-certified real estate appraiser when his or her license
or certificate is on an expired status;

(((9) Failing, upon
demand, to disclose any information within his or her knowledge to, or to
produce any document, book, or record in his or her possession for inspection
of the director or the director's authorized representatives acting by
authority of law;

(10))) (4) Violating any provision of this
chapter or any lawful rule made by the director pursuant thereto;

(((11) Advertising
in a false, fraudulent, or misleading manner;

(12) Suspension,
revocation, or restriction of the individual's license or certification to
practice the profession by competent authority in any state, federal, or
foreign jurisdiction, with a certified copy of the order, stipulation, or
agreement being conclusive evidence of the revocation, suspension, or
restriction;

(13) Failing to
comply with an order issued by the director;

(14) Committing any
act of fraudulent or dishonest dealing or a crime involving moral turpitude,
with a certified copy of the final holding of any court of competent
jurisdiction in such matter being conclusive evidence in any hearing under this
chapter; and

(15))) (5) Issuing an appraisal report on any
real property in which the appraiser has an interest unless his or her interest
is clearly stated in the appraisal report; and

(6) Being affiliated
as an employee or independent contractor with a state-licensed or
state-certified real estate appraiser when the appraiser's license or
certificate has been revoked due to disciplinary action.

Sec. 240. RCW 18.140.170 and 1996
c 182 s 10 are each amended to read as follows:

The director may
investigate the actions of a state-licensed or state-certified real estate
appraiser or an applicant for licensure or certification or relicensure or
recertification. Upon receipt of information indicating that a state-licensed
or state-certified real estate appraiser under this chapter may have violated
this chapter, the director ((shall)) may cause one or more of the
staff investigators to make an investigation of the facts to determine whether
or not there is admissible evidence of any such violation. If technical
assistance is required, a staff investigator may consult with one or more of
the members of the ((committee)) commission.

((In any
investigation made by the director's investigative staff, the director shall
have the power to compel the attendance of witnesses and the production of
books, documents, records, and other papers, to administer oaths, and to take
testimony and receive evidence concerning all matters within the director's
jurisdiction.

If the director
determines, upon investigation, that a state-licensed or state-certified real
estate appraiser under this chapter has violated this chapter, a statement of
charges shall be prepared and served upon the state-licensed or state-certified
real estate appraiser. The statement of charges shall be served as follows:
The statement of charges shall be sent by certified or registered mail, and if
no receipt of service is received, two attempts to personally serve the
statement of charges shall be made. This statement of charges shall require
the accused party to file an answer to the statement of charges within twenty
days of the date of service.

In responding to a
statement of charges, the accused party may admit to the allegations, deny the
allegations, or otherwise plead. Failure to make a timely response shall be
deemed an admission of the allegations contained in the statement of charges
and will result in a default whereupon the director may enter an order under
RCW 34.05.440. If a hearing is requested, the time of the hearing shall be
scheduled but the hearing shall not be held earlier than thirty days after
service of the charges upon the accused. A notice of hearing shall be issued
at least twenty days prior to the hearing, specifying the time, date, and place
of hearing.))

NEW SECTION. Sec.
241. A new section is added
to chapter 18.140 RCW to read as follows:

The real estate
appraiser commission account is created in the state treasury. All fees
received by the department for licenses, registrations, renewals, examinations,
and audits must be forwarded to the state treasurer who must credit the money
to the account. All fines and civil penalties ordered pursuant to RCW
18.140.020, 18.140.160, or section 112 of this act against holders of licenses,
certificates, or registrations issued under the provisions of this chapter must
be paid to the account. All expenses incurred in carrying out the licensing
and registration activities of the department under this chapter must be paid
from the account as authorized by legislative appropriation. Any residue in
the account shall be accumulated and shall not revert to the general fund at
the end of the biennium. All earnings of investments of balances in the
account shall be credited to the general fund. Any fund balance remaining in
the general fund attributable to the real estate appraiser commission account
as of July 1, 2003, must be transferred to the real estate appraiser commission
account.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
242. A new section is added
to chapter 18.140 RCW to read as follows:

The uniform regulation
of business and professions act, chapter 18.--- RCW (sections 101 through 124
of this act), governs unlicensed practice, the issuance and denial of licenses,
and the discipline of licensees under this chapter.

Sec. 243. RCW 18.145.050 and 1995
c 269 s 502 and 1995 c 27 s 6 are each reenacted and amended to read as
follows:

In addition to any
other authority provided by law, the director may:

(1) Adopt rules in
accordance with chapter 34.05 RCW that are necessary to implement this chapter;

(2) Set all renewal,
late renewal, duplicate, and verification fees in accordance with RCW
43.24.086;

(3) Establish the forms
and procedures necessary to administer this chapter;

(4) Issue a certificate
to any applicant who has met the requirements for certification;

(5) Hire clerical((,))
and administrative((, and investigative)) staff as needed to
implement and administer this chapter;

(6) ((Investigate
complaints or reports of unprofessional conduct as defined in this chapter and
hold hearings under chapter 34.05 RCW;

(7) Issue subpoenas
for records and attendance of witnesses, statements of charges, statements of
intent to deny certificates, and orders; administer oaths; take or cause
depositions to be taken; and use other discovery procedures as needed in any
investigation, hearing, or proceeding held under this chapter;

(8))) Maintain the official departmental record of
all applicants and certificate holders;

(((9) Delegate, in
writing to a designee, the authority to issue subpoenas, statements of charges,
and statements of intent to deny certification;

(10))) (7) Approve the preparation and
administration of examinations for certification;

(((11))) (8)
Establish by rule the procedures for an appeal of a failure of an examination;

(((12) Conduct a
hearing under chapter 34.05 RCW on an appeal of a denial of a certificate based
on the applicant's failure to meet minimum qualifications for certification;

(13))) (9) Set the criteria for meeting the
standard required for certification;

(((14))) (10)
Establish advisory committees whose membership shall include representatives of
professional court reporting and stenomasking associations and representatives
from accredited schools offering degrees in court reporting or stenomasking to
advise the director on testing procedures, professional standards, disciplinary
activities, or any other matters deemed necessary;

(((15))) (11)
Establish ad hoc advisory committees whose membership shall include
representatives of professional court reporting and stenomasking associations
and representatives from accredited schools offering degrees in court reporting
or stenomasking to advise the director on testing procedures, professional
standards, ((disciplinary activities,)) or any other matters deemed
necessary.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
244. A new section is added
to chapter 18.145 RCW to read as follows:

The uniform regulation
of business and professions act, chapter 18.--- RCW (sections 101 through 124
of this act), governs unlicensed practice, the issuance and denial of licenses,
and the discipline of licensees under this chapter.

Sec. 245. RCW 18.165.160 and 1997
c 58 s 835 are each amended to read as follows:

In addition to the
unprofessional conduct described in section 114 of this act, the director may
take disciplinary action for the following conduct, acts ((are
prohibited and constitute grounds for disciplinary action, assessing
administrative penalties, or denial, suspension, or revocation of any license
under this chapter, as deemed appropriate by the director)), or
conditions:

(1) ((Knowingly))
Violating any of the provisions of this chapter or the rules adopted
under this chapter;

(2) ((Knowingly))
Making a material misstatement or omission in the application for or
renewal of a ((license or)) firearms certificate, including falsifying
requested identification information;

(3) Not meeting the
qualifications set forth in RCW 18.165.030, 18.165.040, or 18.165.050;

(4) Failing to return
immediately on demand a firearm issued by an employer;

(5) Carrying a firearm
in the performance of his or her duties if not the holder of a valid armed
private investigator license, or carrying a firearm not meeting the provisions
of this chapter while in the performance of his or her duties;

(6) Failing to return
immediately on demand company identification, badges, or other items issued to
the private investigator by an employer;

(7) Making any
statement that would reasonably cause another person to believe that the
private investigator is a sworn peace officer;

(8) Divulging
confidential information obtained in the course of any investigation to which
he or she was assigned;

(9) Acceptance of
employment that is adverse to a client or former client and relates to a matter
about which a licensee has obtained confidential information by reason of or in
the course of the licensee's employment by the client;

(10) ((Conviction of
a gross misdemeanor or felony or the commission of any act involving moral
turpitude, dishonesty, or corruption whether the act constitutes a crime or
not. If the act constitutes a crime, conviction in a criminal proceeding is
not a condition precedent to disciplinary action. Upon such a conviction,
however, the judgment and sentence is conclusive evidence at the ensuing
disciplinary hearing of the guilt of the license holder or applicant of the crime
described in the indictment or information, and of the person's violation of
the statute on which it is based. For the purposes of this section, conviction
includes all instances in which a plea of guilty or nolo contendere is the
basis for the conviction and all proceedings in which the sentence has been
deferred or suspended;

(11) Advertising
that is false, fraudulent, or misleading;

(12) Incompetence or
negligence that results in injury to a person or that creates an unreasonable
risk that a person may be harmed;

(13) Suspension,
revocation, or restriction of the individual's license to practice the
profession by competent authority in any state, federal, or foreign
jurisdiction, a certified copy of the order, stipulation, or agreement being
conclusive evidence of the revocation, suspension, or restriction;

(14) Failure to
cooperate with the director by:

(a) Not furnishing
any necessary papers or documents requested by the director for purposes of
conducting an investigation for disciplinary action, denial, suspension, or
revocation of a license under this chapter;

(b) Not furnishing
in writing a full and complete explanation covering the matter contained in a
complaint filed with the department; or

(c) Not responding
to subpoenas issued by the director, whether or not the recipient of the
subpoena is the accused in the proceeding;

(15) Failure to
comply with an order issued by the director or an assurance of discontinuance
entered into with the director;

(16) Aiding or
abetting an unlicensed person to practice if a license is required;

(17)
Misrepresentation or fraud in any aspect of the conduct of the business or
profession;

(18) Failure to
adequately supervise employees to the extent that the public health or safety
is at risk;

(19) Interference
with an investigation or disciplinary proceeding by willful misrepresentation
of facts before the director or the director's authorized representative, or by
the use of threats or harassment against any client or witness to prevent them
from providing evidence in a disciplinary proceeding or any other legal action;

(20))) Assigning or transferring any license issued
pursuant to the provisions of this chapter, except as provided in RCW
18.165.050;

(((21))) (11)
Assisting a client to locate, trace, or contact a person when the investigator
knows that the client is prohibited by any court order from harassing or
contacting the person whom the investigator is being asked to locate, trace, or
contact, as it pertains to domestic violence, stalking, or minor children;

(((22))) (12)
Failure to maintain bond or insurance;

(((23))) (13)
Failure to have a qualifying principal in place; or

(((24))) (14)
Being certified as not in compliance with a support order ((or a residential
or visitation order)) as provided in RCW 74.20A.320.

Sec. 246. RCW 18.165.170 and 1995
c 277 s 35 are each amended to read as follows:

The director has the
following authority in administering this chapter:

(1) To adopt, amend,
and rescind rules as deemed necessary to carry out this chapter;

(2) ((To issue
subpoenas and administer oaths in connection with an investigation, hearing, or
proceeding held under this chapter;

(3) To take or cause
depositions to be taken and use other discovery procedures as needed in an
investigation, hearing, or proceeding held under this chapter;

(4) To compel
attendance of witnesses at hearings;

(5) In the course of
investigating a complaint or report of unprofessional conduct, to conduct
practice reviews;

(6) To take
emergency action ordering summary suspension of a license, or restriction or
limitation of the licensee's practice pending proceedings by the director;

(7) To use the
office of administrative hearings as authorized in chapter 34.12 RCW to conduct
hearings. However, the director or the director's designee shall make the
final decision in the hearing;

(8))) To enter into contracts for professional
services determined to be necessary for adequate enforcement of this chapter;

(((9))) (3)
To adopt standards of professional conduct or practice;

(((10) In the event
of a finding of unprofessional conduct by an applicant or license holder, to
impose sanctions against a license applicant or license holder as provided by
this chapter;

(11))) (4) To enter into an assurance of
discontinuance in lieu of issuing a statement of charges or conducting a
hearing. The assurance shall consist of a statement of the law in question and
an agreement to not violate the stated provision. The applicant or license
holder shall not be required to admit to any violation of the law, and the
assurance shall not be construed as such an admission. Violation of an
assurance under this subsection is grounds for disciplinary action; and

(((12) To designate
individuals authorized to sign subpoenas and statements of charges;

(13))) (5) To employ such ((investigative,))
administrative((,)) and clerical staff as necessary for the enforcement
of this chapter((;

(14) To compel
attendance of witnesses at hearings; and

(15) To assess
administrative penalties for violations of law, rules, or regulations)).

NEW SECTION. Sec.
247. A new section is added
to chapter 18.165 RCW to read as follows:

The uniform regulation
of business and professions act, chapter 18.--- RCW (sections 101 through 124
of this act), governs unlicensed practice, the issuance and denial of licenses,
and the discipline of licensees under this chapter.

Sec. 248. RCW 18.170.170 and 1997
c 58 s 837 are each amended to read as follows:

In addition to the ((provisions
of RCW 18.170.164, the following acts are prohibited and constitute grounds for
disciplinary action, assessing administrative penalties, or denial, suspension,
or revocation of any license under this chapter, as deemed appropriate by the
director:

(1) Knowingly
violating any of the provisions of this chapter or the rules adopted under this
chapter;

(2))) unprofessional conduct described in section
114 of this act, the following conduct, acts, or conditions constitute
unprofessional conduct:

(1) Knowingly
violating any of the provisions of this chapter or the rules adopted under this
chapter;

(2) Practicing
fraud, deceit, or misrepresentation in any of the private security activities
covered by this chapter;

(3) Knowingly making a
material misstatement or omission in the application for a ((license or))
firearms certificate;

(4) Not meeting the
qualifications set forth in RCW 18.170.030, 18.170.040, or 18.170.060;

(5) Failing to return
immediately on demand a firearm issued by an employer;

(6) Carrying a firearm
in the performance of his or her duties if not the holder of a valid armed
private security guard license, or carrying a firearm not meeting the
provisions of this chapter while in the performance of his or her duties;

(7) Failing to return
immediately on demand any uniform, badge, or other item of equipment issued to
the private security guard by an employer;

(8) Making any
statement that would reasonably cause another person to believe that the
private security guard is a sworn peace officer;

(9) Divulging
confidential information that may compromise the security of any premises, or
valuables shipment, or any activity of a client to which he or she was
assigned;

(10) ((Conviction of
a gross misdemeanor or felony or the commission of any act involving moral
turpitude, dishonesty, or corruption whether the act constitutes a crime or
not. If the act constitutes a crime, conviction in a criminal proceeding is
not a condition precedent to disciplinary action. Upon such a conviction,
however, the judgment and sentence is conclusive evidence at the ensuing
disciplinary hearing of the guilt of the license holder or applicant of the
crime described in the indictment or information, and of the person's violation
of the statute on which it is based. For the purposes of this section,
conviction includes all instances in which a plea of guilty or nolo contendere
is the basis for the conviction and all proceedings in which the sentence has
been deferred or suspended;

(11)
Misrepresentation or concealment of a material fact in obtaining a license or
in reinstatement thereof;

(12) Advertising
that is false, fraudulent, or misleading;

(13) Incompetence or
negligence that results in injury to a person or that creates an unreasonable
risk that a person may be harmed;

(14) Suspension,
revocation, or restriction of the individual's license to practice the
profession by competent authority in any state, federal, or foreign
jurisdiction, a certified copy of the order, stipulation, or agreement being
conclusive evidence of the revocation, suspension, or restriction;

(15) Failure to
cooperate with the director by:

(a) Not furnishing
any necessary papers or documents requested by the director for purposes of
conducting an investigation for disciplinary action, denial, suspension, or
revocation of a license under this chapter;

(b) Not furnishing
in writing a full and complete explanation covering the matter contained in a
complaint filed with the department; or

(c) Not responding
to subpoenas issued by the director, whether or not the recipient of the
subpoena is the accused in the proceeding;

(16) Failure to
comply with an order issued by the director or an assurance of discontinuance
entered into with the disciplining authority;

(17) Aiding or
abetting an unlicensed person to practice if a license is required;

(18)
Misrepresentation or fraud in any aspect of the conduct of the business or
profession;

(19) Failure to
adequately supervise employees to the extent that the public health or safety
is at risk;

(20) Interference
with an investigation or disciplinary proceeding by willful misrepresentation
of facts before the director or the director's authorized representative, or by
the use of threats or harassment against a client or witness to prevent them
from providing evidence in a disciplinary proceeding or any other legal action;

(21))) Assigning or transferring any license issued
pursuant to the provisions of this chapter, except as provided in RCW
18.170.060;

(((22))) (11)
Failure to maintain insurance; and

(((23))) (12)
Failure to have a qualifying principal in place.

Sec. 249. RCW 18.170.180 and 1991
c 334 s 18 are each amended to read as follows:

The director has the
following authority in administering this chapter:

(1) To adopt, amend,
and rescind rules as deemed necessary to carry out this chapter;

(2) ((To issue
subpoenas and administer oaths in connection with an investigation, hearing, or
proceeding held under this chapter;

(3) To take or cause
depositions to be taken and use other discovery procedures as needed in an
investigation, hearing, or proceeding held under this chapter;

(4) To compel
attendance of witnesses at hearings;

(5) In the course of
investigating a complaint or report of unprofessional conduct, to conduct
practice reviews;

(6) To take
emergency action ordering summary suspension of a license, or restriction or
limitation of the licensee's practice pending proceedings by the director;

(7) To use the
office of administrative hearings as authorized in chapter 34.12 RCW to conduct
hearings. However, the director or the director's designee shall make the
final decision in the hearing;

(8) To enter into
contracts for professional services determined to be necessary for adequate
enforcement of this chapter;

(9))) To adopt standards of professional conduct or
practice;

(((10) In the event
of a finding of unprofessional conduct by an applicant or license holder, to
impose sanctions against a license applicant or license holder as provided by
this chapter;

(11))) (3) To enter into an assurance of
discontinuance in lieu of issuing a statement of charges or conducting a
hearing. The assurance shall consist of a statement of the law in question and
an agreement to not violate the stated provision. The applicant or license
holder shall not be required to admit to any violation of the law, and the
assurance shall not be construed as such an admission. Violation of an assurance
under this subsection is grounds for disciplinary action; and

(((12) To designate
individuals authorized to sign subpoenas and statements of charges;

(13))) (4) To employ such ((investigative,))
administrative((,)) and clerical staff as necessary for the enforcement
of this chapter((; and

(14) To compel the
attendance of witnesses at hearings)).

NEW SECTION. Sec.
250. A new section is added
to chapter 18.170 RCW to read as follows:

The uniform regulation
of business and professions act, chapter 18.--- RCW (sections 101 through 124
of this act), governs unlicensed practice, the issuance and denial of licenses,
and the discipline of licensees under this chapter.

Sec. 251. RCW 18.185.110 and 1993
c 260 s 12 are each amended to read as follows:

((The following acts
are prohibited and constitute grounds for disciplinary action or denial,
suspension, or revocation of any license under this chapter, as deemed
appropriate by the director:

(1) Knowingly
violating any of the provisions of this chapter or the rules adopted under this
chapter;

(2) Knowingly making
a material misstatement or omission in the application for or renewal of a
license;

(3))) In addition to the unprofessional conduct
described in section 114 of this act, the following conduct, acts, or
conditions constitute unprofessional conduct:

(1) Violating any of
the provisions of this chapter or the rules adopted under this chapter;

(2) Failing to
meet the qualifications set forth in RCW 18.185.020 and 18.185.030;

(((4) Conviction of
a gross misdemeanor or felony or the commission of any act involving moral
turpitude, dishonesty, or corruption whether the act constitutes a crime or
not. If the act constitutes a crime, conviction in a criminal proceeding is
not a condition precedent to disciplinary action. Upon such a conviction,
however, the judgment and sentence is conclusive evidence at the ensuing
disciplinary hearing of the guilt of the license holder or applicant of the
crime described in the indictment or information, and of the person's violation
of the statute on which it is based. For the purposes of this section,
conviction includes all instances in which a plea of guilty or nolo contendere
is the basis for the conviction and all proceedings in which the sentence has
been deferred or suspended. Nothing in this section abrogates rights
guaranteed under chapter 9.96A RCW;

(5) Advertising that
is false, fraudulent, or misleading;

(6) Incompetence or
negligence that results in injury to a person or that creates an unreasonable
risk that a person may be harmed;

(7) Suspension,
revocation, or restriction of the individual's license to practice the
profession by competent authority in any state, federal, or foreign
jurisdiction, a certified copy of the order, stipulation, or agreement being
conclusive evidence of the revocation, suspension, or restriction;

(8) Failure to
cooperate with the director by not:

(a) Furnishing any
necessary papers or documents requested by the director for purposes of
conducting an investigation for disciplinary action, denial, suspension, or
revocation of a license under this chapter;

(b) Furnishing in
writing a full and complete explanation covering the matter contained in a
complaint filed with the department; or

(c) Responding to
subpoenas issued by the director, whether or not the recipient of the subpoena
is the accused in the proceeding;

(9) Failure to
comply with an order issued by the director or an assurance of discontinuance
entered into with the director;

(10) Aiding or
abetting an unlicensed person to practice if a license is required;

(11))) (3) Knowingly committing, or being a
party to, any material fraud, misrepresentation, concealment, conspiracy,
collusion, trick, scheme, or device whereby any other person lawfully relies
upon the word, representation, or conduct of the licensee;

(((12) Failure to
adequately supervise employees to the extent that the client funds are at risk;

(13) Interference
with an investigation or disciplinary proceeding by willful misrepresentation
of facts before the director or the director's authorized representative, or by
the use of threats or harassment against any client or witness to prevent them
from providing evidence in a disciplinary proceeding or any other legal action;

(14))) (4) Assigning or transferring any
license issued pursuant to the provisions of this chapter, except as provided
in RCW 18.185.030;

(((15))) (5)
Conversion of any money or contract, deed, note, mortgage, or other evidence of
title, to his or her own use or to the use of his or her principal or of any
other person, when delivered to him or her in trust or on condition, in
violation of the trust or before the happening of the condition; and failure to
return any money or contract, deed, note, mortgage, or other evidence of title
within thirty days after the owner is entitled to possession, and makes demand
for possession, shall be prima facie evidence of conversion;

(((16))) (6)
Failing to keep records, maintain a trust account, or return collateral or
security, as required by RCW 18.185.100;

(((17))) (7)
Any conduct in a bail bond transaction which demonstrates bad faith,
dishonesty, or untrustworthiness; or

(((18))) (8)
Violation of an order to cease and desist that is issued by the director under
this chapter.

Sec. 252. RCW 18.185.120 and 1993
c 260 s 13 are each amended to read as follows:

In addition to those
powers set forth in section 104 of this act, the director has the ((following))
authority ((in administering this chapter)):

(1) ((To adopt,
amend, and rescind rules as deemed necessary to carry out this chapter;

(2) To issue an
order providing for one or any combination of the following upon violation or
violations of this chapter: Denying, suspending, or revoking a license;
assessing monetary penalties; restricting or limiting practice; complying with
conditions of probation for a designated period of time; making restitution to
the person harmed by the licensee; or other corrective action;

(3) To issue
subpoenas and administer oaths in connection with an investigation, hearing, or
proceeding held under this chapter;

(4) To take or cause
depositions to be taken and use other discovery procedures as needed in an
investigation, hearing, or proceeding held under this chapter;

(5) To compel
attendance of witnesses at hearings;

(6) To establish
fees by rule under RCW 43.24.086 and chapter 34.05 RCW;

(7) To take emergency
action ordering summary suspension of a license, or restriction or limitation
of the licensee's practice pending proceedings by the director;

(8) To use the
office of administrative hearings as authorized in chapter 34.12 RCW to conduct
hearings. However, the director or the director's designee shall make the
final decision in the hearing;

(9) To enter into
contracts for professional services determined to be necessary for adequate
enforcement of this chapter;

(10) To adopt
standards of professional conduct or practice;

(11) In the event of
a finding of unprofessional conduct by an applicant or license holder, to
impose sanctions against an applicant or license holder as provided by this
chapter;

(12))) To order restitution to the person harmed
by the licensee; or

(2) To enter
into an assurance of discontinuance in lieu of issuing a statement of charges
or conducting a hearing. The assurance shall consist of a statement of the law
in question and an agreement to not violate the stated provision. The
applicant or license holder shall not be required to admit to any violation of
the law, and the assurance shall not be construed as such an admission.
Violation of an assurance under this subsection is grounds for disciplinary
action((;

(13) To designate
individuals authorized to sign subpoenas and statements of charges; and

(14) To employ such
investigative, administrative, and clerical staff as necessary for the
enforcement of this chapter)).

Sec. 253. RCW 18.185.140 and 1993
c 260 s 15 are each amended to read as follows:

(((1) If the
director determines, upon investigation, that there is reason to believe a
violation of this chapter has occurred, a statement of charges shall be
prepared and served upon the license holder or applicant and)) When a
statement of charges is issued against a license holder or applicant under
section 106 of this act, notice of this action must be given to the
owner or qualified agent of the employing bail bond agency. ((The statement
of charges shall be accompanied by a notice that the license holder or
applicant may request a hearing to contest the charges. The license holder or
applicant must file a request for hearing with the department within twenty
days after being served the statement of charges. The failure to request a
hearing constitutes a default, whereupon the director may enter an order under
RCW 34.05.440.

(2) If a hearing is
requested, the time of the hearing shall be scheduled but the hearing shall not
be held earlier than thirty days after service of the charges upon the license
holder or applicant. A notice of hearing shall be issued at least twenty days
prior to the hearing, specifying the time, date, and place of the hearing.))

Sec. 254. RCW 18.185.170 and 1993
c 260 s 18 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) ((The director
shall investigate complaints concerning practice by unlicensed persons of a
profession or business for which a license is required by this chapter. In the
investigation of the complaints, the director has the same authority as
provided the director under RCW 18.185.140. The director shall issue a cease
and desist order to a person after notice and hearing and upon a determination
that the person has violated this subsection. If the director makes a written
finding of fact that the public interest will be irreparably harmed by delay in
issuing an order, the director may issue a temporary cease and desist order.
The cease and desist order shall not relieve the person practicing or operating
a business without a license from criminal prosecution therefor, but the remedy
of a cease and desist order shall be in addition to any criminal liability.
The cease and desist order is conclusive proof of unlicensed practice and may
be enforced under RCW 7.21.060. This method of enforcement of the cease and
desist order may be used in addition to, or as an alternative to, any
provisions for enforcement of agency orders.

(2) The attorney
general, a county prosecuting attorney, the director, or any person may, in
accordance with the law of this state governing injunctions, maintain an action
in the name of this state to enjoin any person practicing a profession or
business for which a license is required by this chapter without a license from
engaging in such practice or operating such business until the required license
is secured. However, the injunction shall not relieve the person practicing or
operating a business without a license from criminal prosecution therefor, but
the remedy by injunction shall be in addition to any criminal liability.

(3))) After June 30, 1994, any person who performs
the functions and duties of a bail bond agent in this state without being
licensed in accordance with the provisions of this chapter, or any person
presenting or attempting to use as his or her own the license of another, or
any person who gives false or forged evidence of any kind to the director in
obtaining a license, or any person who falsely impersonates any other licensee,
or any person who attempts to use an expired or revoked license, or any person
who violates any of the provisions of this chapter is guilty of a gross
misdemeanor.

(((4))) (2)
After January 1, 1994, a person is guilty of a gross misdemeanor if he or she
owns or operates a bail bond agency in this state without first obtaining a
bail bond agency license.

(((5))) (3)
After June 30, 1994, the owner or qualified agent of a bail bond agency is
guilty of a gross misdemeanor if he or she employs any person to perform the
duties of a bail bond agent without the employee having in his or her
possession a permanent bail bond agent license issued by the department.

(((6) All fees,
fines, forfeitures, and penalties collected or assessed by a court because of a
violation of this section shall be remitted to the department.))

NEW SECTION. Sec.
255. A new section is added
to chapter 18.185 RCW to read as follows:

The uniform regulation
of business and professions act, chapter 18.--- RCW (sections 101 through 124
of this act), governs unlicensed practice, the issuance and denial of licenses,
and the discipline of licensees under this chapter.

Sec. 256. RCW 18.210.020 and 1999
c 263 s 3 are each amended to read as follows:

(((1))) In
addition to the unprofessional conduct described in section 114 of this act, the
following conduct, acts, and conditions constitute unprofessional conduct ((for
any person issued, or applying for, a practice permit or license under this
chapter)):

(((a) Any act
involving moral turpitude, dishonesty, or corruption relating to the practice
of on-site wastewater treatment designs or inspections, whether or not the act
constitutes a crime;

(b)
Misrepresentation or concealment of a material fact in applying for, obtaining,
or reinstating a practice permit or license;

(c) Any advertising
which is false, fraudulent, or misleading;

(d) Incompetence,
gross negligence, or malpractice that results in injury to an individual,
damage to property, or adverse impact on the environment;

(e) As determined by
the board, failure to provide to the board in a timely manner any lawfully
requested information or documentation regarding a pending application, license
renewal application, or administrative proceeding;

(f) Failure to
comply with an order issued or approved by the board;

(g) Aiding or
abetting a person in engaging in practice without a required practice permit or
license;

(h) Practicing
beyond the scope of practice as defined by law or rule;

(i) Misrepresentation
or fraud in any aspect of the conduct of the business or profession of
designing on-site wastewater treatment systems;

(j) Failure to
adequately supervise auxiliary staff to the extent that the consumer's health
or safety is at risk;

(k) Interference
with an investigation or disciplinary proceeding by willful misrepresentation
of facts before the board or its authorized representative, or by the use of
threats or harassment against any person who may serve as a witness in any
adjudicative proceeding before the board;

(l))) (1) Practicing with a practice permit
or license issued under this chapter that is expired, suspended, or revoked;

(((m))) (2)
Being willfully untruthful or deceptive in any document, report, statement,
testimony, or plan that pertains to the design or construction of an on-site
wastewater treatment system; and

(((n))) (3)
Submission of a design or as-built record to a local health jurisdiction, to
the department of health, or to the department of ecology, that is knowingly
based upon false, incorrect, misleading, or fabricated information((; and

(o) Any act or
omission that is contrary to the standard of practice for individuals
authorized to practice under this chapter.

(2) If an act
constitutes a crime, conviction in a criminal proceeding is not a condition
precedent to disciplinary action. Upon conviction, however, the judgment and
sentence is conclusive evidence, at the ensuing disciplinary hearing, of guilt
of the crime described in the complaint, indictment, or information, and of
violation of the statute on which it is based. For the purposes of this
section, conviction includes all instances in which a plea of guilty or nolo
contendere is the basis for the conviction and in all proceedings in which the
sentence has been deferred or suspended)).

Sec. 257. RCW 18.210.030 and 1999
c 263 s 4 are each amended to read as follows:

(((1) The board,
upon finding a violation of this chapter, has the exclusive power to:

(a) Reprimand an
applicant, licensee, or practice permit holder;

(b) Suspend, revoke,
or refuse to renew a license or practice permit;

(c) Deny an
application for a practice permit or license; and

(d) Impose any
monetary penalty not exceeding one thousand dollars for each violation upon an
applicant, licensee, or permit holder.

(2) Any person may
file with the board a complaint alleging violation of this chapter. All
complaints alleging violation of this chapter must be in writing and sworn to
by the person making the allegation.

(3) All procedures
related to hearings on any complaint alleging violations of this chapter must
comply with provisions governing adjudicative proceedings as set forth in
chapter 34.05 RCW, the administrative procedure act.

(4))) The board shall immediately suspend the
license or practice permit of a person who has been certified pursuant to RCW
74.20A.320 by the department of social and health services as a person who is
not in compliance with a support order. If the person has continued to meet
all other requirements for a license under this chapter during the suspension,
reissuance of the license or certificate shall be automatic upon the
department's receipt of a release issued by the department of social and health
services stating that the licensee is in compliance with the child support
order. The procedure in RCW 74.20A.320 is the exclusive administrative remedy
for contesting the establishment of noncompliance with a child support order,
and suspension of a license under this subsection, and satisfies the
requirements of RCW 34.05.422.

Sec. 258. RCW 18.210.060 and 1999
c 263 s 7 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) The board may:

(a) Adopt rules to
implement this chapter including, but not limited to, evaluation of experience,
examinations, and scope and standards of practice;

(b) Administer
licensing examinations; and

(c) Review and approve
or deny initial and renewal license applications((;

(d) Conduct
investigations of complaints alleging violations of this chapter;

(e) Conduct
adjudicative proceedings in accordance with the administrative procedure act,
chapter 34.05 RCW;

(f) Issue
investigative subpoenas to compel the production of records, maps, and other
documents, as may be related to the investigation of violations of this
chapter; and

(g) Take
disciplinary action as provided for in RCW 18.43.110 and 18.43.120)).

(2) The board shall
consider recommendations of the advisory committee made in accordance with this
chapter.

Sec. 259. RCW 18.210.160 and 1999
c 263 s 17 are each amended to read as follows:

(((1))) On or
after July 1, 2003, it is a gross misdemeanor for any person, not otherwise
exempt from the requirements of this chapter, to: (((a))) (1)
Perform on-site wastewater treatment systems design services without a license;
(((b))) (2) purport to be qualified to perform those services
without having been issued a standard license under this chapter; (((c)))
(3) attempt to use the license or seal of another; (((d))) (4)
attempt to use a revoked or suspended license; or (((e))) (5)
attempt to use false or fraudulent credentials. In addition, action may be
taken under section 116 of this act.

(((2) The board may
exercise its authority under RCW 18.43.120 in dealing with persons described in
subsection (1) of this section.))

NEW SECTION. Sec.
260. A new section is added
to chapter 18.210 RCW to read as follows:

The uniform regulation
of business and professions act, chapter 18.--- RCW (sections 101 through 124
of this act), governs unlicensed practice, the issuance and denial of licenses,
and the discipline of licensees under this chapter.

Sec. 261. RCW 18.220.040 and 2000
c 253 s 5 are each amended to read as follows:

The director has the
following authority in administering this chapter:

(1) To adopt, amend,
and rescind rules approved by the board as deemed necessary to carry out this
chapter;

(2) To adopt fees as
provided in RCW 43.24.086;

(3) To administer
licensing examinations approved by the board and to adopt or recognize
examinations prepared by other organizations as approved by the board;

(4) ((To issue
subpoenas and administer oaths in connection with an investigation, hearing, or
proceeding held under this chapter;

(5) To take or cause
depositions to be taken and use other discovery procedures as needed in an
investigation, hearing, or proceeding held under this chapter;

(6) To compel
attendance of witnesses at hearings;

(7) In the course of
investigating a complaint or report of unprofessional conduct, to direct the
board to conduct practice reviews and disciplinary hearings;

(8) To take emergency
action ordering summary suspension of a license, or restrict or limit a
licensee's practice pending further proceedings by the director;

(9) To use the board
or, at the request of the board, the office of administrative hearings, as
authorized in chapter 34.12 RCW, to conduct hearings. However, the director or
the director's designee shall make the final decision as to disposition of the
charges;

(10) To enter into
contracts for professional services determined to be necessary for adequate
enforcement of this chapter;

(11))) To adopt standards of professional conduct and
practice as approved by the board; and

(((12) In the event
of a finding of unprofessional conduct by an applicant or license holder, to
impose sanctions against a license applicant or license holder as provided by
this chapter;

(13))) (5) To enter into an assurance of
discontinuance in lieu of issuing a statement of charges or conducting a
hearing. The assurance shall consist of a statement of the law in question and
an agreement to not violate the stated provision. Violation of an assurance
under this subsection is grounds for disciplinary action((;

(14) To designate
individuals authorized to sign subpoenas and statement of charges; and

(15) To employ
investigative, administrative, and clerical staff as necessary for the
enforcement of this chapter)).

Sec. 262. RCW 18.220.050 and 2000
c 253 s 6 are each amended to read as follows:

The board has the
following authority in administering this chapter:

(1) To establish rules,
including board organization and assignment of terms, and meeting frequency and
timing, for adoption by the director;

(2) To establish the
minimum qualifications for applicants for licensure as provided by this
chapter;

(3) To approve the
method of administration for examinations required by this chapter or by rule
as established by the director. To approve the adoption or recognition of
examinations prepared by other organizations for adoption by the director. To
set the time and place of examinations with the approval of the director;

(4) To establish and
review standards of professional conduct and practice for adoption by the
director. Rules of professional conduct will be consistent with those outlined
for engineers and land surveyors; and

(5) To designate
specialties of geology to be licensed under this chapter((;

(6) To conduct
disciplinary hearings; and

(7) To conduct
practice reviews)).

Sec. 263. RCW 18.220.130 and 2000
c 253 s 14 are each amended to read as follows:

In addition to the
unprofessional conduct described in section 114 of this act, the following conduct,
acts ((are prohibited and)), and conditions constitute ((grounds
for disciplinary action or denial, suspension, or revocation of any license
under this chapter)) unprofessional conduct:

(1) ((Knowingly))
Violating any of the provisions of this chapter or the rules adopted
under this chapter;

(2) ((Knowingly
making a material misstatement or omission in the application for or renewal of
a license;

(3))) Not meeting the qualifications for licensing
set forth by this chapter;

(((4) Incompetency,
misconduct, fraud, gross negligence, or repeated incidents of negligence in or
related to the practice of geology;

(5) Conviction of a
gross misdemeanor or felony or the commission of any act involving moral
turpitude, dishonesty, or corruption whether or not the act constitutes a
crime. If the act constitutes a crime, conviction in a criminal proceeding is
not a condition precedent to disciplinary action. Upon such conviction,
however, the judgment and sentence is conclusive evidence at the ensuing
disciplinary hearing of the guilt of the license holder or applicant of the
crime described in the indictment or information, and of the person's violation
of the statute on which it was based. For the purposes of this section,
conviction includes all instances in which a plea of guilty or nolo contendere
is the basis for the conviction and all proceedings in which the sentence has
been deferred or suspended. Nothing in this section abrogates rights
guaranteed under chapter 9.96A RCW;

(6) Advertising that
is false, fraudulent, or misleading;

(7) Suspension, revocation,
or restriction of the individual's license to practice the profession by
competent authority in any state, federal, or foreign jurisdiction, a certified
copy of the order, stipulation, or agreement being conclusive evidence of the
revocation, suspension, or restriction;

(8) Aiding or
abetting an unlicensed person to practice if a license is required;

(9) Failure to
adequately supervise subordinates to the extent that the public health or
safety is at risk;

(10) Failure to
cooperate with the director by:

(a) Not furnishing
any necessary papers or documents requested by the director for purposes of
conducting an investigation for disciplinary action, denial, suspension, or
revocation of a license under this chapter;

(b) Not furnishing
in writing a full and complete explanation covering the matter contained in a
complaint filed with the department; or

(c) Not responding
to subpoenas issued by the director, whether or not the recipient of the
subpoena is the accused in the proceeding;

(11))) (3) Failure to comply with an ((order
issued by the director or an)) assurance of discontinuance entered into
with the director;

(((12) Interference
with an investigation or disciplinary proceeding by willful misrepresentation
of facts before the director or the director's authorized representative, or by
use of threats or harassment against any client or witness to prevent them from
providing evidence in a disciplinary proceeding or any other legal action;))
or

(((13))) (4)
Committing any other act, or failing to act, which act or failure are
customarily regarded as being contrary to the accepted professional conduct or
standard generally expected of those practicing geology.

Sec. 264. RCW 18.220.150 and 2000
c 253 s 16 are each amended to read as follows:

A person, including but
not limited to consumers, licensees, corporations, organizations, and state and
local governments or agencies, may submit a written complaint to the department
charging a license holder or applicant with unprofessional conduct and
specifying the grounds for the charge. If the director determines that the
complaint merits investigation, or if the director has reason to believe,
without a formal complaint, that a license holder or applicant may have engaged
in unprofessional conduct, the director ((shall)) may investigate
to determine if there has been unprofessional conduct. A person who files a
complaint under this section in good faith is immune from suit in any civil
action related to the filing or contents of the complaint. ((The director,
individuals acting on the director's behalf, and members of the board are
immune from suit in any action, civil or criminal, based on disciplinary
proceedings or other official acts performed in the course of their duties in
the administration and enforcement of this chapter.))

NEW SECTION. Sec.
265. A new section is added
to chapter 18.220 RCW to read as follows:

The uniform regulation
of business and professions act, chapter 18.--- RCW (sections 101 through 124
of this act), governs unlicensed practice, the issuance and denial of licenses,
and the discipline of licensees under this chapter.

Sec. 266. RCW 19.16.120 and 1997 c
58 s 847 are each amended to read as follows:

In addition to other
provisions of this chapter, ((any license issued pursuant to this chapter or
any application therefor may be denied, not renewed, revoked, or suspended, or
in lieu of or in addition to suspension a licensee may be assessed a civil,
monetary penalty in an amount not to exceed one thousand dollars)) and
the unprofessional conduct described in section 114 of this act, the following
conduct, acts, or conditions constitute unprofessional conduct:

(1) If an individual
applicant or licensee is less than eighteen years of age or is not a resident
of this state.

(2) If an applicant or
licensee is not authorized to do business in this state.

(3) If the application
or renewal forms required by this chapter are incomplete, fees required under
RCW 19.16.140 and 19.16.150, if applicable, have not been paid, and the surety
bond or cash deposit or other negotiable security acceptable to the director
required by RCW 19.16.190, if applicable, has not been filed or renewed or is
canceled.

(4) If any individual
applicant, owner, officer, director, or managing employee of a nonindividual
applicant or licensee:

(a) ((Shall have
knowingly made a false statement of a material fact in any application for a
collection agency license or an out-of-state collection agency license or
renewal thereof, or in any data attached thereto and two years have not elapsed
since the date of such statement;

(b) Shall have had a
license to engage in the business of a collection agency or out-of-state
collection agency denied, not renewed, suspended, or revoked by this state, any
other state, or foreign country, for any reason other than the nonpayment of
licensing fees or failure to meet bonding requirements: PROVIDED, That the terms
of this subsection shall not apply if:

(i) Two years have
elapsed since the time of any such denial, nonrenewal, or revocation; or

(ii) The terms of
any such suspension have been fulfilled;

(c) Has been
convicted in any court of any felony involving forgery, embezzlement, obtaining
money under false pretenses, larceny, extortion, or conspiracy to defraud and
is incarcerated for that offense or five years have not elapsed since the date
of such conviction;

(d))) Has had any judgment entered against him or
her in any civil action involving forgery, embezzlement, obtaining money
under false pretenses, larceny, extortion, or conspiracy to defraud and five
years have not elapsed since the date of the entry of the final judgment in
said action: PROVIDED, That in no event shall a license be issued unless the
judgment debt has been discharged;

(((e))) (b)
Has had his or her license to practice law suspended or revoked and two
years have not elapsed since the date of such suspension or revocation, unless
he or she has been relicensed to practice law in this state;

(((f))) (c)
Has had any judgment entered against ((him or it)) such a person
under the provisions of RCW 19.86.080 or 19.86.090 involving a violation or
violations of RCW 19.86.020 and two years have not elapsed since the entry of
the final judgment: PROVIDED, That in no event shall a license be issued
unless the terms of such judgment, if any, have been fully complied with:
PROVIDED FURTHER, That said judgment shall not be grounds for denial, suspension,
nonrenewal, or revocation of a license unless the judgment arises out of and is
based on acts of the applicant, owner, officer, director, managing employee, or
licensee while acting for or as a collection agency or an out-of-state
collection agency;

(((g))) (d)
Has petitioned for bankruptcy, and two years have not elapsed since the filing
of ((said)) the petition;

(((h) Shall be))
(e) Is insolvent in the sense that ((his or its)) the person's
liabilities exceed ((his or its)) the person's assets or in the
sense that ((he or it)) the person cannot meet ((his or its))
obligations as they mature;

(((i))) (f)
Has failed to pay any civil, monetary penalty assessed in accordance with RCW
19.16.351 ((or 19.16.360)) within ten days after the assessment becomes
final;

(((j))) (g)
Has ((knowingly)) failed to comply with, or violated any provisions of
this chapter or any rule or regulation issued pursuant to this chapter, and two
years have not elapsed since the occurrence of said noncompliance or violation;
or

(((k))) (h)
Has been found by a court of competent jurisdiction to have violated the
federal fair debt collection practices act, 15 U.S.C. Sec. 1692 et seq., or the
Washington state consumer protection act, chapter 19.86 RCW, and two years have
not elapsed since that finding.

Except as otherwise
provided in this section, any person who is engaged in the collection agency
business as of January 1, 1972, shall, upon filing the application,
paying the fees, and filing the surety bond or cash deposit or other negotiable
security in lieu of bond required by this chapter, be issued a license under
this chapter.

The director shall
immediately suspend the license or certificate of a person who has been
certified pursuant to RCW 74.20A.320 by the department of social and health
services as a person who is not in compliance with a support order ((or a
residential or visitation order)). If the person has continued to meet all
other requirements for reinstatement during the suspension, reissuance of the
license or certificate shall be automatic upon the director's receipt of a
release issued by the department of social and health services stating that the
licensee is in compliance with the order.

Sec. 267. RCW 19.16.351 and 1977
ex.s. c 194 s 2 are each amended to read as follows:

The board, in addition
to any other powers and duties granted under this chapter and section 104 of
this act:

(1) May adopt, amend,
and rescind ((such)) rules ((and regulations)) for its own
organization and procedure and ((such)) other rules ((and regulations))
as it may deem necessary in order to perform its duties ((hereunder)) under
this chapter.

(2) ((When an
applicant or licensee has requested a hearing as provided in RCW 19.16.360 the
board shall meet and after notice and hearing may deny any application for a
license hereunder, and may fail to renew, suspend, or revoke any license issued
hereunder, if the applicant or licensee has failed to comply with or violated
any provision of this chapter or any rule or regulation issued pursuant to this
chapter. In its discretion, the board may assess a civil, monetary penalty
against a licensee in an amount not to exceed one thousand dollars in lieu of
or in addition to suspension. It shall be the duty of the board within thirty
days after the last day of hearing to notify the appellant of its decision.

(3))) May inquire into the needs of the collection
agency business, the needs of the director, and the matter of the policy of the
director in administering this chapter, and make such recommendations with
respect thereto as, after consideration, may be deemed important and necessary
for the welfare of the state, the welfare of the public, and the welfare and
progress of the collection agency business.

(((4))) (3)
Upon request of the director, confer and advise in matters relating to the
administering of this chapter.

(((5))) (4)
May consider and make appropriate recommendations to the director in all
matters referred to the board.

(((6))) (5)
Upon ((his)) request of the director, confer with and advise the
director in the preparation of any rules ((and regulations)) to be
adopted, amended, or repealed.

(((7))) (6)
May assist the director in the collection of such information and data as the
director may deem necessary to the proper administration of this chapter.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
268. A new section is added
to chapter 19.16 RCW to read as follows:

The uniform regulation
of business and professions act, chapter 18.--- RCW (sections 101 through 124
of this act), governs unlicensed practice, the issuance and denial of licenses,
and the discipline of licensees under this chapter.

Sec. 269. RCW 19.31.070 and 1969
ex.s. c 228 s 7 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) The director shall
administer the provisions of this chapter and shall issue from time to time
reasonable rules and regulations for enforcing and carrying out the provisions
and purposes of this chapter.

(2) ((The director
shall have power to compel the attendance of witnesses by the issuance of
subpoenas, to administer oaths, and to take testimony and proofs concerning all
matters pertaining to the administration of this chapter.

(3))) The director shall have supervisory and
investigative authority over all employment agencies. Upon receiving a
complaint against any employment agency, the director shall have the right to
examine all books, documents, or records in its possession. In addition, the
director may examine the office or offices where business is or shall be
conducted by such agency.

Sec. 270. RCW 19.31.130 and 1997 c
58 s 848 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) In accordance with
the provisions of chapter 34.05 RCW ((as now or as hereafter amended)),
the director may by order ((deny, suspend or revoke)) sanction
the license of any employment agency under section 112 of this act, if
((he)) the director finds that the applicant or licensee((:

(a) Was previously
the holder of a license issued under this chapter, which was revoked for cause
and never reissued by the director, or which license was suspended for cause
and the terms of the suspension have not been fulfilled;

(b) Has been found
guilty of any felony within the past five years involving moral turpitude, or
for any misdemeanor concerning fraud or conversion, or suffering any judgment
in any civil action involving wilful fraud, misrepresentation or conversion;

(c) Has made a false
statement of a material fact in his application or in any data attached thereto;

(d))) has violated any provisions of this
chapter, or failed to comply with any rule or regulation issued by the director
pursuant to this chapter.

(2) The director shall
immediately suspend the license or certificate of a person who has been certified
pursuant to RCW 74.20A.320 by the department of social and health services as a
person who is not in compliance with a support order ((or a residential or
visitation order)). If the person has continued to meet all other
requirements for reinstatement during the suspension, reissuance of the license
or certificate shall be automatic upon the director's receipt of a release
issued by the department of social and health services stating that the
licensee is in compliance with the order.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
271. A new section is added
to chapter 19.31 RCW to read as follows:

The uniform regulation
of business and professions act, chapter 18.--- RCW (sections 101 through 124
of this act), governs unlicensed practice, the issuance and denial of licenses,
and the discipline of licensees under this chapter.

Sec. 272. RCW 19.105.350 and 1988
c 159 s 10 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) If the purchaser
will own or acquire title to specified real property or improvements to be
acquired by the camping resort, the director may by order require to the extent
necessary to protect the interests of the purchasers or owners of camping resort
contracts, that an appropriate portion of the proceeds paid under those camping
resort contracts be placed in a separate reserve fund to be set aside and
applied toward the purchase price of the real property, improvements, or
facilities.

(2) The director may ((deny
or suspend)) take any of the actions authorized in section 112 of this
act against a registration in which the registrant is advertising or
offering annual or periodic dues or assessments by members that the director
finds would result in the registrant's future inability to fund operating
costs.

Sec. 273. RCW 19.105.380 and 1997
c 58 s 850 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) ((A registration
or an application for registration of camping resort contracts or renewals
thereof may by order be denied, suspended, or revoked if the director finds
that)) In addition to the unprofessional conduct in section 114 of this
act, the director may take disciplinary action for the following conduct, acts,
or conditions:

(a) ((The
advertising, sales techniques, or trade practices of the applicant, registrant,
or its affiliate or agent have been or are deceptive, false, or misleading;

(b))) The applicant ((or)), registrant,
or affiliate has failed to file copies of the camping resort contract form
under RCW 19.105.360;

(((c))) (b)
The applicant, registrant, or affiliate has failed to comply with any provision
of this chapter((, the rules adopted or the conditions of a permit granted
under this chapter, or a stipulation or final order previously entered into by
the operator or issued by the department under this chapter));

(((d))) (c)
The applicant's, registrant's, or affiliate's offering of camping resort
contracts has worked or would work a fraud upon purchasers or owners of camping
resort contracts;

(((e))) (d)
The camping resort operator or any officer, director, or affiliate of the
camping resort operator has been ((within the last five years convicted of
or pleaded nolo contendre to any misdemeanor or felony involving conversion,
embezzlement, theft, fraud, or dishonesty, has been)) enjoined from or had
any civil penalty assessed for a finding of dishonest dealing or fraud in a
civil suit, or been found to have engaged in any violation of any act designed
to protect consumers, or has been engaged in dishonest practices in any
industry involving sales to consumers;

(((f))) (e)
The applicant or registrant has represented or is representing to purchasers in
connection with the offer or sale of a camping resort contract that a camping
resort property, facility, amenity camp site, or other development is planned,
promised, or required, and the applicant or registrant has not provided the
director with a security or assurance of performance as required by this
chapter;

(((g))) (f)
The applicant or registrant has not provided or is no longer providing the
director with the necessary security arrangements to ((assure)) ensure
future availability of titles or properties as required by this chapter or
agreed to in the permit to market;

(((h))) (g)
The applicant or registrant is or has been employing unregistered salespersons
or offering or proposing a membership referral program not in compliance with
this chapter;

(((i))) (h)
The applicant or registrant has breached any escrow, impound, reserve account,
or trust arrangement or the conditions of an order or permit to market required
by this chapter;

(((j) The applicant
or registrant has breached any stipulation or order entered into in settlement
of the department's filing of a previous administrative action;

(k))) (i) The applicant or registrant has
filed or caused to be filed with the director any document or affidavit, or
made any statement during the course of a registration or exemption procedure
with the director, that is materially untrue or misleading;

(((l))) (j)
The applicant or registrant has engaged in a practice of failing to provide the
written disclosures to purchasers or prospective purchasers as required under
this chapter;

(((m))) (k)
The applicant, registrant, or any of its officers, directors, or employees, if
the operator is other than a natural person, have willfully done, or
permitted any of their salespersons or agents to do, any of the following:

(i) Engage in a pattern
or practice of making untrue or misleading statements of a material fact, or
omitting to state a material fact;

(ii) Employ any device,
scheme, or artifice to defraud purchasers or members;

(iii) Engage in a
pattern or practice of failing to provide the written disclosures to purchasers
or prospective purchasers as required under this chapter;

(((n))) (l)
The applicant or registrant has failed to provide a bond, letter of credit, or
other arrangement to ((assure)) ensure delivery of promised
gifts, prizes, awards, or other items of consideration, as required under this
chapter, breached such a security arrangement, or failed to maintain such a security
arrangement in effect because of a resignation or loss of a trustee, impound,
or escrow agent;

(((o))) (m)
The applicant or registrant has engaged in a practice of selling contracts
using material amendments or codicils that have not been filed or are the
consequences of breaches or alterations in previously filed contracts;

(((p))) (n)
The applicant or registrant has engaged in a practice of selling or proposing
to sell contracts in a ratio of contracts to sites available in excess of that
filed in the affidavit required by this chapter;

(((q))) (o)
The camping resort operator has withdrawn, has the right to withdraw, or is
proposing to withdraw from use all or any portion of any camping resort
property devoted to the camping resort program, unless:

(i) Adequate provision
has been made to provide within a reasonable time thereafter a substitute
property in the same general area that is at least as desirable for the purpose
of camping and outdoor recreation;

(ii) The property is
withdrawn because, despite good faith efforts by the camping resort operator, a
nonaffiliate of the camping resort has exercised a right of withdrawal from use
by the camping resort (such as withdrawal following expiration of a lease of
the property to the camping resort) and the terms of the withdrawal right have
been disclosed in writing to all purchasers at or prior to the time of any
sales of camping resort contracts after the camping resort has represented to
purchasers that the property is or will be available for camping or recreation
purposes;

(iii) The specific date
upon which the withdrawal becomes effective has been disclosed in writing to
all purchasers and members prior to the time of any sales of camping resort
contracts after the camping resort has represented to purchasers that the
property is or will be available for camping or recreation purposes;

(iv) The rights of
members and owners of the camping resort contracts under the express terms of
the camping resort contract have expired, or have been specifically limited,
upon the lapse of a stated or determinable period of time, and the director by
order has found that the withdrawal is not otherwise inconsistent with the
protection of purchasers or the desire of the majority of the owners of camping
resort contracts, as expressed in their previously obtained vote of approval;

(((r))) (p)
The format, form, or content of the written disclosures provided therein is not
complete, full, or materially accurate, or statements made therein are
materially false, misleading, or deceptive;

(((s) The applicant
or registrant has failed or declined to respond to any subpoena lawfully issued
and served by the department under this chapter;

(t))) (q) The applicant or registrant has
failed to file an amendment for a material change in the manner or at the time
required under this chapter or its implementing rules;

(((u))) (r)
The applicant or registrant has filed voluntarily or been placed involuntarily
into a federal bankruptcy or is proposing to do so; or

(((v))) (s)
A camping resort operator's rights or interest in a campground has been
terminated by foreclosure or the operations in a camping resort have been
terminated in a manner contrary to contract provisions.

(2) ((Any applicant
or registrant who has violated subsection (1)(a), (b), (c), (f), (h), (i), (j),
(l), (m), or (n) of this section may be fined by the director in an amount not
to exceed one thousand dollars for each such violation. Proceedings seeking
such fines shall be held in accordance with chapter 34.05 RCW and may be filed
either separately or in conjunction with other administrative proceedings to
deny, suspend, or revoke registrations authorized under this chapter. Fines
collected from such proceedings shall be deposited in the state general fund.

(3))) An operator, registrant, or applicant against
whom administrative or legal proceedings have been filed shall be responsible
for and shall reimburse the state, by payment into the general fund, for all
administrative and legal costs actually incurred by the department in issuing,
processing, and conducting any such administrative or legal proceeding
authorized under this chapter that results in a final legal or administrative
determination of any type or degree in favor of the department.

(((4) No order may
be entered under this section without appropriate prior notice to the applicant
or registrant of opportunity for a hearing and written findings of fact and
conclusions of law, except that the director may by order summarily deny an
application for registration or renewal under any of the above subsections and
may summarily suspend or revoke a registration under subsection (1)(d), (f),
(g), (h), (i), (k), (l), (m), and (n) of this section. No fine may be imposed
by summary order.

(5) The proceedings
to deny an application or renewal, suspend or revoke a registration or permit,
whether summarily or otherwise, or impose a fine shall be held in accordance
with chapter 34.05 RCW.

(6))) (3) The director may enter into
assurances of discontinuance in lieu of issuing a statement of charges or a
cease and desist order or conducting a hearing under this chapter. The
assurances shall consist of a statement of the law in question and an agreement
not to violate the stated provision. The applicant or registrant shall not be
required to admit to any violation of the law, nor shall the assurance be
construed as such an admission. Violating or breaching an assurance under this
subsection is grounds for suspension or revocation of registration or
imposition of a fine.

(((7))) (4)
The director shall immediately suspend the license or certificate of a person
who has been certified pursuant to RCW 74.20A.320 by the department of social
and health services as a person who is not in compliance with a support order
((or a residential or visitation order)). If the person has continued
to meet all other requirements for reinstatement during the suspension,
reissuance of the license or certificate shall be automatic upon the director's
receipt of a release issued by the department of social and health services
stating that the licensee is in compliance with the order.

Sec. 274. RCW 19.105.440 and 1997
c 58 s 851 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) A salesperson may
apply for registration by filing in a complete and readable form with the
director an application form provided by the director ((which)) that
includes the following:

(a) A statement whether
or not the applicant ((within the past five years has been convicted of,
pleaded nolo contendre to, or been ordered to serve probation for a period of a
year or more for any misdemeanor or felony involving conversion, embezzlement,
theft, fraud, or dishonesty or the applicant has been enjoined from, had any
civil penalty assessed for, or)) has been found to have engaged in
any violation of any act designed to protect consumers and whether the
applicant is qualified for licensure under section 114 of this act;

(b) A statement fully
describing the applicant's employment history for the past five years and
whether or not any termination of employment ((during the last five years))
was the result of any theft, fraud, or act of dishonesty;

(c) A consent to
service comparable to that required of operators under this chapter; and

(d) Required filing
fees.

(2) ((The director
may by order deny, suspend, or revoke a camping resort salesperson's
registration or application for registration under this chapter or the person's
license or application under chapter 18.85 RCW, or impose a fine on such
persons not exceeding two hundred dollars per violation, if the director finds
that the order is necessary for the protection of purchasers or owners of
camping resort contracts and the applicant or registrant is guilty of)) In
addition to the unprofessional conduct specified in section 114 of this act,
the director may take disciplinary action against a camping resort
salesperson's registration or application for registration under this chapter
or the person's license or application under chapter 18.85 RCW for any of the
following conduct, acts, or conditions:

(a) ((Obtaining
registration by means of fraud, misrepresentation, or concealment, or through
the mistake or inadvertence of the director;

(b))) Violating any of the provisions of this
chapter or any lawful rules adopted by the director pursuant thereto;

(((c) Being
convicted in a court of competent jurisdiction of this or any other state, or
federal court, of forgery, embezzlement, obtaining money under false pretenses,
bribery, larceny, extortion, conspiracy to defraud, or any similar offense or
offenses. For the purposes of this section, "being convicted"
includes all instances in which a plea of guilty or nolo contendere is the
basis for the conviction, and all proceedings in which the sentence has been
deferred or suspended;

(d))) (b) Making, printing, publishing,
distributing, or causing, authorizing, or knowingly permitting the making,
printing, publication, or distribution of false statements, descriptions, or
promises of such character as to reasonably induce any person to act thereon,
if the statements, descriptions, or promises purport to be made or to be
performed by either the applicant or registrant and the applicant or registrant
then knew or, by the exercise of reasonable care and inquiry, could have known,
of the falsity of the statements, descriptions, or promises;

(((e))) (c)
Knowingly committing, or being a party to, any material fraud,
misrepresentation, concealment, conspiracy, collusion, trick, scheme, or device
whereby any other person lawfully relies upon the work, representation, or conduct
of the applicant or registrant;

(((f) Failing, upon
demand, to disclose to the director or the director's authorized
representatives acting by authority of law any information within his or her
knowledge or to produce for inspection any document, book or record in his or
her possession, which is material to the salesperson's registration or
application for registration;

(g))) (d) Continuing to sell camping resort
contracts in a manner whereby the interests of the public are endangered, if
the director has, by order in writing, stated objections thereto;

(((h) Committing any
act of fraudulent or dishonest dealing or a crime involving moral turpitude,
and a certified copy of the final holding of any court of competent
jurisdiction in such matter shall be conclusive evidence in any hearing under
this chapter;

(i))) (e) Misrepresentation of membership in
any state or national association; or

(((j))) (f)
Discrimination against any person in hiring or in sales activity on the basis
of race, color, creed, or national origin, or violating any state or federal
antidiscrimination law.

(3) ((No order may
be entered under this section without appropriate prior notice to the applicant
or registrant of opportunity for a hearing and written findings of fact and
conclusions of law, except that the director may by order summarily deny an
application for registration under this section.

(4) The proceedings
to deny an application or renewal, suspend or revoke a registration or permit,
whether summarily or otherwise, or impose a fine shall be held in accordance
with chapter 34.05 RCW.

(5))) The director, subsequent to any complaint
filed against a salesperson or pursuant to an investigation to determine
violations, may enter into stipulated assurances of discontinuances in lieu of
issuing a statement of charges or a cease and desist order or conducting a
hearing. The assurance shall consist of a statement of the law in question and
an agreement not to violate the stated provision. The salesperson shall not be
required to admit to any violation of the law, nor shall the assurance be
construed as such an admission. Violation of an assurance under this
subsection is grounds for ((a)) disciplinary action((, a suspension
of registration, or a fine not to exceed one thousand dollars)).

(((6))) (4)
The director may by rule require such further information or conditions for
registration as a camping resort salesperson, including qualifying examinations
and fingerprint cards prepared by authorized law enforcement agencies, as the
director deems necessary to protect the interests of purchasers.

(((7))) (5)
Registration as a camping resort salesperson shall be effective for a period of
one year unless the director specifies otherwise or the salesperson transfers
employment to a different registrant. Registration as a camping resort
salesperson shall be renewed annually, or at the time of transferring
employment, whichever occurs first, by the filing of a form prescribed by the
director for that purpose.

(((8))) (6)
It is unlawful for a registrant of camping resort contracts to employ or a
person to act as a camping resort salesperson covered under this section unless
the salesperson has in effect with the department and displays a valid
registration in a conspicuous location at each of the sales offices at which
the salesperson is employed. It is the responsibility of both the operator and
the salesperson to notify the department when and where a salesperson is
employed, his or her responsibilities and duties, and when the salesperson's
employment or reported duties are changed or terminated.

(((9))) (7)
The director shall immediately suspend the license or certificate of a person
who has been certified pursuant to RCW 74.20A.320 by the department of social
and health services as a person who is not in compliance with a support order
((or a residential or visitation order)). If the person has continued
to meet all other requirements for reinstatement during the suspension,
reissuance of the license or certificate shall be automatic upon the director's
receipt of a release issued by the department of social and health services
stating that the licensee is in compliance with the order.

Sec. 275. RCW 19.105.470 and 2000
c 171 s 69 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) Whenever it appears
to the director that any person has engaged or is about to engage in any act or
practice constituting a violation of any provision of this chapter, any
withdrawal of a camping resort property in violation of RCW 19.105.380(1)(((q)))
(o), or any rule, order, or permit issued under this chapter, the
director may in his or her discretion issue an order directing the person to
cease and desist from continuing the act or practice. ((Reasonable notice
of and opportunity for a hearing shall be given.)) The procedures in
section 116 of this act apply to these cease and desist orders. However,
the director may issue a temporary order pending the hearing which shall be
effective immediately upon delivery to the person affected and which shall
remain in effect until ten days after the hearing is held and which shall
become final if the person to whom notice is addressed does not request a
hearing ((within fifteen days after receipt of notice)).

(2) If it appears
necessary in order to protect the interests of members and purchasers, whether
or not the director has issued a cease and desist order, the attorney general
in the name of the state, the director, the proper prosecuting attorney, an
affiliated members' common-interest association, or a group of members as a
class, may bring an action in any court of competent jurisdiction to enjoin any
such acts or practices and to enforce compliance with this chapter or any rule,
order, or permit under this chapter. Upon a proper showing, a permanent or
temporary injunction, restraining order, or writ of mandamus shall be granted
and a receiver or conservator may be appointed for the defendant, for the
defendant's assets, or to protect the interests or assets of a members'
common-interest association or the members of a camping resort as a class. The
state, the director, a members' common-interest association, or members as a
class shall not be required to post a bond in such proceedings.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
276. A new section is added
to chapter 19.105 RCW to read as follows:

The uniform regulation
of business and professions act, chapter 18.--- RCW (sections 101 through 124
of this act), governs unlicensed practice, the issuance and denial of licenses,
and the discipline of licensees under this chapter.

Sec. 277. RCW 19.138.120 and 1999
c 238 s 4 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) Each seller of travel
shall renew its registration on or before July 1st of every year or as
otherwise determined by the director.

(2) Renewal of a
registration is subject to the same provisions covering ((issuance,
suspension, and revocation of)) disciplinary action as a
registration originally issued.

(3) The
director may refuse to renew a registration for any of the grounds set out
under RCW 19.138.130 and section 114 of this act, and where the past
conduct of the applicant affords reasonable grounds for belief that the
applicant will not carry out the applicant's duties in accordance with law and
with integrity and honesty. The director shall promptly notify the applicant
in writing by certified mail of its intent to refuse to renew the
registration. The registrant may((, within twenty-one days after receipt of
that notice or intent,)) request a hearing on the refusal as provided in
section 106 of this act. The director may permit the registrant to honor
commitments already made to its customers, but no new commitments may be
incurred, unless the director is satisfied that all new commitments are
completely bonded or secured to ((insure)) ensure that the
general public is protected from loss of money paid to the registrant. ((It
is the responsibility of the registrant to contest the decision regarding
conditions imposed or registration denied through the process established by
the administrative procedure act, chapter 34.05 RCW.))

Sec. 278. RCW 19.138.130 and 1999
c 238 s 5 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) ((The director
may deny, suspend, or revoke the registration of a seller of travel if the
director finds that the applicant)) In addition to the unprofessional
conduct described in section 114 of this act, the director may take
disciplinary action based on the following conduct, acts, or conditions if the
applicant or registrant:

(a) Was previously the
holder of a registration issued under this chapter, and the registration was
revoked for cause and never reissued by the director, or the registration was
suspended for cause and the terms of the suspension have not been fulfilled;

(b) ((Has been found
guilty of a felony within the past ten years involving moral turpitude, or of a
misdemeanor concerning fraud or conversion, or)) Suffers a judgment
in a civil action involving willful fraud, misrepresentation, or conversion;

(c) ((Has made a
false statement of a material fact in an application under this chapter or in
data attached to it;

(d))) Has violated this chapter or failed to comply
with a rule adopted by the director under this chapter; or

(((e))) (d)
Has failed to display the registration as provided in this chapter((;

(f) Has published or
circulated a statement with the intent to deceive, misrepresent, or mislead the
public; or

(g) Has committed a
fraud or fraudulent practice in the operation and conduct of a travel agency
business, including, but not limited to, intentionally misleading advertising)).

(2) If the seller of
travel is found in violation of this chapter or in violation of the consumer
protection act, chapter 19.86 RCW, by the entry of a judgment or by settlement
of a claim, the director may revoke the registration of the seller of travel,
and the director may reinstate the registration at the director's discretion.

(3) The director shall
immediately suspend the license or certificate of a person who has been
certified pursuant to RCW 74.20A.320 by the department of social and health
services as a person who is not in compliance with a support order ((or a
residential or visitation order)). If the person has continued to meet all
other requirements for reinstatement during the suspension, reissuance of the
license or certificate shall be automatic upon the director's receipt of a
release issued by the department of social and health services stating that the
licensee is in compliance with the order.

Sec. 279. RCW 19.138.170 and 1999
c 238 s 7 are each amended to read as follows:

The director has the
following powers and duties:

(1) To adopt, amend,
and repeal rules to carry out the purposes of this chapter;

(2) ((To issue and
renew registrations under this chapter and to deny or refuse to renew for
failure to comply with this chapter;

(3) To suspend or
revoke a registration for a violation of this chapter;

(4))) To establish fees;

(((5))) (3)
Upon receipt of a complaint, to inspect and audit the books and records of a
seller of travel. The seller of travel shall immediately make available to the
director those books and records as may be requested at the seller of travel's
place of business or at a location designated by the director. For that
purpose, the director shall have full and free access to the office and places
of business of the seller of travel during regular business hours. When ten or
more complaints have been received by either the department or the attorney
general on a seller of travel within a period of ninety days, the department
shall inspect and audit books and records of the seller of travel; and

(((6)))
(4) To do all things necessary to carry out the functions, powers, and
duties set forth in this chapter.

Sec. 280. RCW 19.138.180 and 1994
c 237 s 15 are each amended to read as follows:

The
director, in the director's discretion, may:

(1) Annually, or more
frequently, make public or private investigations within or without this state
as the director deems necessary to determine whether a registration should be
((granted, denied, revoked, or suspended)) subject to disciplinary
action, or whether a person has violated or is about to violate this
chapter or a rule adopted or order issued under this chapter, or to aid in the
enforcement of this chapter or in the prescribing of rules and forms of this
chapter;

(2) Publish information
concerning a violation of this chapter or a rule adopted or order issued under
this chapter; and

(3) Investigate
complaints concerning practices by sellers of travel for which registration is
required by this chapter.

Sec. 281. RCW 19.138.200 and 1994
c 237 s 20 are each amended to read as follows:

The director or
individuals acting on the director's behalf are immune from suit in any action,
civil or criminal, based on ((disciplinary proceedings or other official))
acts performed in the course of their duties in the administration and
enforcement of this chapter.

Sec. 282. RCW 19.138.240 and 1994
c 237 s 21 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) ((The director
may assess against a person or organization that violates this chapter, or a
rule adopted under this chapter, a civil penalty of not more than one thousand
dollars for each violation.

(2) The person or
organization shall be afforded the opportunity for a hearing, upon request made
to the director within thirty days after the date of issuance of the notice of
assessment. The hearing shall be conducted in accordance with chapter 34.05
RCW.

(3))) A civil penalty shall be imposed by the court
for each violation of this chapter in an amount not less than five hundred
dollars nor more than two thousand dollars per violation.

(((4))) (2)
If a person fails to pay an assessment after it has become a final and
unappealable order, or after the court has entered final judgment in favor of
the state, the director may recover the amount assessed by action in the
appropriate superior court. In the action, the validity and appropriateness of
the final order imposing the penalty shall not be subject to review.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
283. A new section is added
to chapter 19.138 RCW to read as follows:

The uniform regulation
of business and professions act, chapter 18.--- RCW (sections 101 through 124
of this act), governs unlicensed practice, the issuance and denial of licenses,
and the discipline of licensees under this chapter.

Sec. 284. RCW 19.158.040 and 1989
c 20 s 4 are each amended to read as follows:

In addition to the
unprofessional conduct described in section 114 of this act, the director of
the department of licensing may take disciplinary action for any of the
following conduct, acts, or conditions:

(1) It shall be
unlawful for any person to engage in unfair or deceptive commercial telephone
solicitation.

(2) A commercial
telephone solicitor shall not place calls to any residence which will be
received before 8:00 a.m. or after 9:00 p.m. at the purchaser's local time.

(3) A commercial
telephone solicitor may not engage in any conduct the natural consequence of
which is to harass, intimidate, or torment any person in connection with the
telephone call.

Sec. 285. RCW 19.158.050 and 1997
c 58 s 853 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) In order to
maintain or defend a lawsuit or do any business in this state, a commercial
telephone solicitor must be registered with the department of licensing. Prior
to doing business in this state, a commercial telephone solicitor shall
register with the department of licensing. Doing business in this state
includes both commercial telephone solicitation from a location in Washington
and solicitation of purchasers located in Washington.

(2) The department of
licensing, in registering commercial telephone solicitors, shall have the
authority to require the submission of information necessary to assist in
identifying and locating a commercial telephone solicitor, including past
business history, prior judgments, and such other information as may be useful
to purchasers.

(3) The department of
licensing shall issue a registration number to the commercial telephone
solicitor.

(4) ((It is a
violation of this chapter for a commercial telephone solicitor to:)) In
addition to the unprofessional conduct described in section 114 of this act,
the director of the department of licensing may take disciplinary action for
any of the following conduct, acts, or conditions:

(a) Failing to
maintain a valid registration;

(b) ((Advertise))
Advertising that one is registered as a commercial telephone solicitor
or ((to)) representing that such registration constitutes
approval or endorsement by any government or governmental office or agency;

(c) ((Provide
inaccurate or incomplete information to the department of licensing when making
a registration application; or

(d))) Representing that a person is
registered or that such person has a valid registration number when such person
does not.

(5) An annual
registration fee shall be assessed by the department of licensing, the amount
of which shall be determined at the discretion of the director of the
department of licensing, and which shall be reasonably related to the cost of
administering the provisions of this chapter.

(6) The department
shall immediately suspend the license or certificate of a person who has been
certified pursuant to RCW 74.20A.320 by the department of social and health
services as a person who is not in compliance with a support order ((or a
residential or visitation order)). If the person has continued to meet all
other requirements for reinstatement during the suspension, reissuance of the
license or certificate shall be automatic upon the department's receipt of a release
issued by the department of social and health services stating that the
licensee is in compliance with the order.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
286. A new section is added
to chapter 19.158 RCW to read as follows:

The uniform regulation
of business and professions act, chapter 18.--- RCW (sections 101 through 124
of this act), governs unlicensed practice, the issuance and denial of licenses,
and the discipline of licensees under this chapter.

Sec. 287. RCW 42.44.030 and 1985 c
156 s 3 are each amended to read as follows:

In addition to the
unprofessional conduct specified in section 114 of this act, the director
may deny appointment as a notary public to any person ((who)) based
on the following conduct, acts, or conditions:

(1) ((Has been
convicted of a serious crime;

(2))) Has had ((a notary appointment or other))
disciplinary action taken against any professional license ((revoked,
suspended, or restricted)) in this or any other state; or

(((3))) (2)
Has engaged in official misconduct as defined in ((section 17(1) of this act))
RCW 42.44.160(1), whether or not criminal penalties resulted((; or

(4) Has performed a
notarial act or acts in a manner found by the director to constitute gross
negligence, a course of negligent conduct, or reckless disregard of his or her
responsibility as a notary public)).

The director shall
deliver a certificate evidencing the appointment to each person appointed as a
notary public. The certificate may be signed in facsimile by the governor, the
secretary of state, and the director or the director's designee. The
certificate must bear a printed seal of the state of Washington.

Sec. 288. RCW 42.44.060 and 1985 c
156 s 6 are each amended to read as follows:

A person appointed as a
notary public by the director may perform notarial acts in this state for a
term of four years, unless:

(1) Disciplinary
action has been taken against the notarial appointment ((has been
revoked under RCW 42.44.130 or 42.44.140)), including a shorter term,
suspension, or revocation; or

(2) The notarial
appointment has been resigned.

Sec. 289. RCW 42.44.160 and 1985 c
156 s 16 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) A notary public
commits official misconduct when he or she signs a certificate evidencing a
notarial act, knowing that the contents of the certificate are false. Official
misconduct also constitutes unprofessional conduct for which disciplinary
action may be taken.

(2) A notary public who
commits an act of official misconduct shall be guilty of a gross misdemeanor.

(3) Any person not
appointed as a notary public who acts as or otherwise impersonates a notary
public shall be guilty of a gross misdemeanor.

Sec. 290. RCW 42.44.170 and 1985 c
156 s 17 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) ((The director
may revoke the appointment of any notary public for any reason for which
appointment may be denied under RCW 42.44.030.

(2))) The director shall revoke the appointment of a
notary public upon a judicial finding of incompetency of the notary public. If
a notary public is found to be incompetent, his or her guardian or conservator
shall within thirty days of such finding mail or deliver to the director a
letter of resignation on behalf of the notary public.

(((3))) (2)
A notary public may voluntarily resign by mailing or delivering to the director
a letter of resignation.

Sec. 291. RCW 42.44.190 and 1985 c
156 s 20 are each amended to read as follows:

((On or before
January 1, 1986,)) The director ((shall)) may adopt
rules ((to carry out)) consistent with this chapter. Such rules
shall include but shall not be limited to rules concerning applications for
appointment, application and renewal fees, fees chargeable for notarial
services, the replacement of lost or stolen seals or stamps, changes of names
or addresses of notaries, resignations of notaries, ((appeals of denials and
revocations of appointments,)) and issuance of evidences of authenticity of
notarial seals and signatures.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
292. A new section is added
to chapter 42.44 RCW to read as follows:

The uniform regulation
of business and professions act, chapter 18.--- RCW (sections 101 through 124
of this act), governs unlicensed practice, the issuance and denial of licenses,
and the discipline of licensees under this chapter.

Sec. 293. RCW 46.72.100 and 1983 c
164 s 8 are each amended to read as follows:

In addition to the
unprofessional conduct specified in section 114 of this act, the director
may ((refuse to issue a permit or certificate, or he may suspend or revoke a
permit or certificate)) take disciplinary action if he or she
has good reason to believe that one of the following is true of the operator or
the applicant for a permit or certificate: (1) ((He has been convicted of
an offense of such a nature as to indicate that he is unfit to hold a
certificate or permit; (2))) He or she is guilty of
committing two or more offenses for which mandatory revocation of driver's license
is provided by law; (((3))) (2) he or she has been
convicted of vehicular homicide or vehicular assault; (((4))) (3)
he or she is intemperate or addicted to the use of narcotics.

((Notice of the
director to refuse, suspend, or revoke the permit or certificate shall be given
by certified mail to the holder or applicant for the permit or certificate and
shall designate a time and place for a hearing before the director, which shall
not be less than ten days from the date of the notice. If the director, after
the hearing, decides that a permit shall be canceled or revoked, he shall
notify the holder or applicant to that effect by certified mail. The applicant
or permit holder may within thirty days from the date of the decision appeal to
the superior court of Thurston county for a review of the decision by filing a
copy of the notice with the clerk of the superior court and a copy of the
notice in the office of the director. The court shall set the matter down for
hearing with the least possible delay.))

Any for hire operator
who operates a for hire vehicle without first having filed a bond or insurance
policy and having received a for hire permit and a for hire certificate as
required by this chapter is guilty of a gross misdemeanor, and upon conviction
shall be punished by imprisonment in jail for a period not exceeding ninety
days or a fine of not exceeding five hundred dollars, or both fine and
imprisonment.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
294. A new section is added
to chapter 46.72 RCW to read as follows:

The uniform regulation
of business and professions act, chapter 18.--- RCW (sections 101 through 124
of this act), governs unlicensed practice, the issuance and denial of licenses,
and the discipline of licensees under this chapter.

Sec. 295. RCW 46.72A.100 and 1996
c 87 s 13 are each amended to read as follows:

The ((department may
suspend, revoke, or refuse to issue a license if it has good reason to believe
that)) director may impose any of the sanctions specified in section 112
of this act for unprofessional conduct as described in section 114 of this act
or if one of the following is true of a chauffeur hired to drive a
limousine including where such a chauffeur is also the carrier: (1) The
person has been convicted of an offense of such a nature as to indicate that he
or she is unfit to qualify as a chauffeur; (2) the person is guilty of
committing two or more offenses for which mandatory revocation of a driver's
license is provided by law; (3) the person has been convicted of vehicular
homicide or vehicular assault; (4) the person is intemperate or addicted to
narcotics.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
296. A new section is added
to chapter 46.72A RCW to read as follows:

The uniform regulation
of business and professions act, chapter 18.--- RCW (sections 101 through 124
of this act), governs unlicensed practice, the issuance and denial of licenses,
and the discipline of licensees under this chapter.

Sec. 297. RCW 64.36.040 and 1983
1st ex.s. c 22 s 5 are each amended to read as follows:

If no stop order is in
effect and no proceeding is pending under RCW 64.36.100, a complete
registration application becomes effective at 3:00 p.m. Pacific Standard Time
on the afternoon of the thirtieth calendar day after the filing of the
application or the last amendment or at such earlier time as the director
determines.

Sec. 298. RCW 64.36.090 and 1987 c
370 s 9 are each amended to read as follows:

The director may ((by
order deny, suspend, or revoke)) take disciplinary action against a
timeshare salesperson's registration or application for registration or a
salesperson's license under chapter 18.85 RCW who is selling under this
chapter, if the director finds that the ((order is in the public interest
and the)) applicant or registrant has committed unprofessional conduct
as described in section 114 of this act. In addition, the director may take
disciplinary action if the applicant or registrant:

(1) Has filed an
application for registration as a timeshare salesperson or as a licensee under
chapter 18.85 RCW which, as of its effective date, is incomplete in any
material respect ((or contains any statement which is, in the light of the
circumstances under which it was made, false or misleading with respect to any
material fact));

(2) Has violated or
failed to comply with any provision of this chapter or a predecessor act or any
rule or order issued under this chapter or a predecessor act;

(3) ((Has been
convicted within the past five years of any misdemeanor or felony involving
theft, fraud, or any consumer protection statute, or any felony involving moral
turpitude;

(4))) Is permanently or temporarily enjoined by any
court or administrative order from engaging in or continuing any conduct or
practice involving any aspect of the timeshare business;

(((5))) (4)
Has engaged in dishonest or unethical practices in the timeshare, real estate,
or camp resort business;

(((6))) (5)
Is insolvent either in the sense that the individual's liabilities exceed his
or her assets or in the sense that the individual cannot meet his or her
obligations as they mature; or

(((7))) (6)
Has not complied with any condition imposed by the director or is not qualified
on the basis of such factors as training, experience, or knowledge of the
timeshare business or this chapter.

((The director may
by order summarily postpone or suspend registration of the salesperson pending
final determination of any proceeding under RCW 64.36.180.))

Sec. 299. RCW 64.36.100 and 1987 c
370 s 10 are each amended to read as follows:

(((1))) The
director may ((issue an order denying, suspending, or revoking)) deny
or take disciplinary action against any timeshare application or
registration if the director finds that the ((order is in the public interest
and that)) applicant or registrant has engaged in unprofessional conduct
as described in section 114 of this act. In addition, the director may deny or
take disciplinary action based on the following conduct, acts, or conditions:

(((a))) (1)
The application, written disclosure, or registration is incomplete ((or
contains any statement which is false or misleading with respect to any
material fact));

(((b) Any provision
of this chapter, the permit to market, or any rule or order lawfully issued
under this chapter has been violated by the promoter, its affiliates, or any
natural person whose signature is required under this chapter;

(c))) (2) The activities of the promoter
include, or would include, activities which are unlawful or in violation of a
law, rule, or ordinance in this state or another jurisdiction;

(((d))) (3)
The timeshare offering has worked or tended to work a fraud on purchasers, or
would likely be adverse to the interests or the economic or physical welfare of
purchasers;

(((e))) (4)
The protections and security arrangements to ((assure)) ensure
future quiet enjoyment required under RCW 64.36.130 have not been provided as
required by the director for the protection of purchasers((:));
or

(((f))) (5)
The operating budget proposed by the promoter or promoter-controlled
association appears inadequate to meet operating costs or funding of reserve
accounts or fees for a consultant to determine adequacy have not been paid by
the promoter.

(((2) The director
shall promptly notify the applicant or registrant of any order denying,
suspending, or revoking registration and of the applicant's or registrant's
right to request a hearing within fifteen days of notification. If the
applicant or registrant does not request a hearing, the order remains in effect
until the director modifies or vacates it.))

Sec. 300. RCW 64.36.195 and 1987 c
370 s 7 are each amended to read as follows:

The director or persons
to whom the director delegates such powers may enter into assurances of
discontinuance in lieu of issuing a statement of charges or a cease and desist
order or conducting a hearing under this chapter. The assurances shall consist
of a statement of the law in question and an agreement to not violate the
stated provision. The applicant or registrant shall not be required to admit
to any violation of the law, nor shall the assurance be construed as such an
admission. Violation or breaching of an assurance under this section shall ((be
grounds for a suspension, revocation of registration, or imposition of a fine))
constitute unprofessional conduct for which disciplinary action may be taken
under sections 112 and 114 of this act.

Sec. 301. RCW 64.36.200 and 1983
1st ex.s. c 22 s 19 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) The director may
order any person to cease and desist from an act or practice if it appears that
the person is violating or is about to violate any provision of this chapter or
any rule or order issued under this chapter.

(2) Upon the entry of
the temporary order to cease and desist, the director shall promptly notify the
recipient of the order that it has been entered and the reasons therefor and
that if requested in writing by such person within fifteen days after ((receipt))
service of the director's notification, the matter will be scheduled for
hearing which shall be held within a reasonable time and in accordance with
chapter 34.05 RCW. The temporary order shall remain in effect until ten days
after the hearing is held.

(3) If a person does
not request a hearing ((within fifteen days after receipt of notice of
opportunity for hearing)), the order shall become final.

(4) Unlicensed
timeshare activity is subject to section 116 of this act.

Sec. 302. RCW 64.36.220 and 1983
1st ex.s. c 22 s 21 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) The attorney
general, in the name of the state or the director, may bring an action to
enjoin any person from violating any provision of this chapter. Upon a proper
showing, the superior court shall grant a permanent or temporary injunction,
restraining order, or writ of mandamus. The court may make any additional
orders or judgments which may be necessary to restore to any person any
interest in any money or property, real or personal, which may have been
acquired by means of any act prohibited or declared to be unlawful under this
chapter. The prevailing party may recover costs of the action, including a
reasonable attorney's fee.

(2) The superior court
issuing an injunction shall retain jurisdiction. Any person who violates the
terms of an injunction shall pay a civil penalty of not more than twenty-five
thousand dollars.

(3) The attorney
general, in the name of the state or the director, may apply to the superior
court to appoint a receiver or conservator for any person, or the assets of any
person, who is subject to a cease and desist order, permanent or temporary injunction,
restraining order, or writ of mandamus.

(4) ((Any person who
violates any provision of this chapter is subject to a civil penalty not to
exceed two thousand dollars for each violation. Civil penalties authorized by
this subsection shall be imposed in a civil action brought by the attorney
general and shall be deposited in the general fund of the state treasury. Any
action for recovery of a civil penalty shall be commenced within five years of
the date of the alleged violation)) Proceedings for injunctions for
unlicensed timeshare activity must be conducted under the provisions of section
116 of this act.

Sec. 303. RCW 64.36.230 and 1983
1st ex.s. c 22 s 22 are each amended to read as follows:

(((1))) Any
person who violates RCW 64.36.020 is guilty of a gross misdemeanor punishable
under chapter 9A.20 RCW. Any person who knowingly violates RCW 64.36.020 or
64.36.210 is guilty of a class C felony punishable under chapter 9A.20 RCW. No
indictment or information for a felony may be returned under this chapter more
than five years after the alleged violation.

(((2) The director
may refer evidence concerning violations of this chapter to the attorney
general or the proper prosecuting attorney who may, with or without this
reference, institute appropriate criminal proceedings.))

NEW SECTION. Sec.
304. A new section is added
to chapter 64.36 RCW to read as follows:

The uniform regulation
of business and professions act, chapter 18.--- RCW (sections 101 through 124
of this act), governs unlicensed practice, the issuance and denial of licenses,
and the discipline of licensees under this chapter.

Sec. 305. RCW 67.08.010 and 1997 c
205 s 2 are each amended to read as follows:

(((1))) The
department shall have power to issue and ((for cause to revoke, suspend, or
deny)) take disciplinary action as provided in section 114 of this act
against a license to conduct, hold, or promote boxing, martial arts, or
wrestling events or closed circuit telecasts of these events as provided in
this chapter and chapter 18.--- RCW (sections 101 through 124 of this act)
under such terms and conditions and at such times and places as the department
may determine.

(((2) In case the
department revokes, suspends, or denies any license or issues a fine, such
applicant, or license shall be entitled, upon application, to a hearing to be
held under chapter 34.05 RCW, the administrative procedure act.))

Sec. 306. RCW 67.08.015 and 2000 c
151 s 2 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) In the interest of
ensuring the safety and welfare of the participants, the department shall have
power and it shall be its duty to direct, supervise, and control all boxing,
martial arts, and wrestling events conducted within this state and an event may
not be held in this state except in accordance with the provisions of this
chapter. The department may, in its discretion, issue and for cause, which
includes concern for the safety and welfare of the participants, ((deny,
revoke, or suspend)) take any of the actions specified in section 112 of
this act against a license to promote, conduct, or hold boxing, kickboxing,
martial arts, or wrestling events where an admission fee is charged by any
person, club, corporation, organization, association, or fraternal society.

(2) All boxing,
kickboxing, martial arts, or wrestling events that:

(a) Are conducted by
any common school, college, or university, whether public or private, or by the
official student association thereof, whether on or off the school, college, or
university grounds, where all the participating contestants are bona fide
students enrolled in any common school, college, or university, within or
without this state; or

(b) Are entirely
amateur events promoted on a nonprofit basis or for charitable purposes;

are not subject to the
licensing provisions of this chapter. A boxing, martial arts, kickboxing, or
wrestling event may not be conducted within the state except under a license
issued in accordance with this chapter and the rules of the department except
as provided in this section.

(3) The director shall
prohibit events unless all of the contestants are either licensed under this
chapter or trained by an amateur or professional sanctioning body recognized by
the department.

Sec. 307. RCW 67.08.017 and 1997 c
205 s 4 are each amended to read as follows:

In addition to the
powers described in sections 104 and 105 of this act, the director or the
director's designee has the following authority in administering this chapter:

(1) Adopt, amend, and
rescind rules as deemed necessary to carry out this chapter;

(2) ((Issue
subpoenas and administer oaths in connection with an investigation, hearing, or
proceeding held under this chapter;

(3) Take or cause
depositions to be taken and use other discovery procedures as needed in an
investigation, hearing, or proceeding held under this chapter;

(4) Compel
attendance of witnesses at hearings;

(5) In the course of
investigating a complaint or report of unprofessional conduct, conduct practice
reviews;

(6) Take emergency
action ordering summary suspension of a license, or restriction or limitation
of the licensee's practice pending proceedings by the director;

(7) Use the office
of administrative hearings as authorized in chapter 34.12 RCW to conduct
hearings. However, the director or the director's designee shall make the
final decision in the hearing;

(8) Enter into
contracts for professional services determined to be necessary for adequate
enforcement of this chapter;

(9))) Adopt standards of professional conduct or
practice;

(((10) In the event
of a finding of unprofessional conduct by an applicant or license holder,
impose sanctions against a license applicant or license holder as provided by
this chapter;

(11))) (3) Enter into an assurance of
discontinuance in lieu of issuing a statement of charges or conducting a
hearing. The assurance shall consist of a statement of the law in question and
an agreement not to violate the stated provision. The applicant or license
holder shall not be required to admit to any violation of the law, and the
assurance shall not be construed as such an admission. Violation of an
assurance under this subsection is grounds for disciplinary action; and

(((12) Designate
individuals authorized to sign subpoenas and statements of charges;

(13) Employ the
investigative, administrative, and clerical staff necessary for the enforcement
of this chapter;

(14) Compel the
attendance of witnesses at hearings; and

(15))) (4) Establish and assess fines for
violations of this chapter that may be subject to payment from a contestant's
purse.

Sec. 308. RCW 67.08.090 and 1999 c
282 s 6 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) Each contestant for
boxing, kickboxing, or martial arts events shall be examined within twenty-four
hours before the contest by an event physician licensed by the department. The
event physician shall report in writing and over his or her signature before
the event the physical condition of each and every contestant to the inspector
present at such contest. No contestant whose physical condition is not
approved by the event physician shall be permitted to participate in any
event. Blank forms for event physicians' reports shall be provided by the
department and all questions upon such blanks shall be answered in full. The
event physician shall be paid a fee and travel expenses by the promoter.

(2) The department may
require that an event physician be present at a wrestling event. The promoter
shall pay the event physician present at a wrestling event. A boxing,
kickboxing, or martial arts event may not be held unless an event physician
licensed by the department is present throughout the event.

(3) Any physician
licensed under RCW 67.08.100 may be selected by the department as the event
physician. The event physician present at any contest shall have authority to
stop any event when in the event physician's opinion it would be dangerous to a
contestant to continue, and in such event it shall be the event physician's
duty to stop the event.

(4) The department may
have a participant in a wrestling event examined by an event physician licensed
by the department prior to the event. A participant in a wrestling event whose
condition is not approved by the event physician shall not be permitted to
participate in the event.

(5) Each contestant for
boxing, kickboxing, martial arts, or wrestling events may be subject to a
random urinalysis or chemical test within twenty-four hours before or after a
contest. In addition to the unprofessional conduct specified in section 114
of this act, an applicant or licensee who refuses or fails to submit to the
urinalysis or chemical test is subject to disciplinary action under ((RCW
67.08.240)) section 112 of this act. If the urinalysis or chemical
test is positive for substances prohibited by rules adopted by the director, the
applicant or licensee has engaged in unprofessional conduct and
disciplinary action ((shall)) may be taken under ((RCW
67.08.240)) section 112 of this act.

Sec. 309. RCW 67.08.100 and 2001 c
246 s 1 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) The department upon
receipt of a properly completed application and payment of a nonrefundable fee,
may grant an annual license to an applicant for the following: (a) Promoter;
(b) manager; (c) boxer; (d) second; (e) wrestling participant; (f) inspector;
(g) judge; (h) timekeeper; (i) announcer; (j) event physician; (k) referee; (l)
matchmaker; (m) kickboxer; and (n) martial arts participant.

(2) The application for
the following types of licenses shall include a physical performed by a
physician, as defined in RCW 67.08.002, which was performed by the physician
with a time period preceding the application as specified by rule: (a) Boxer;
(b) wrestling participant; (c) kickboxer; (d) martial arts participant; and (e)
referee.

(3) An applicant for
the following types of licenses for the sports of boxing, kickboxing, and
martial arts shall provide annual proof of certification as having adequate
experience, skill, and training from an organization approved by the
department, including, but not limited to, the association of boxing
commissions, the international boxing federation, the international boxing
organization, the Washington state association of professional ring officials,
the world boxing association, the world boxing council, or the world boxing
organization for boxing officials, and the united full contact federation for
kickboxing and martial arts officials: (a) Judge; (b) referee; (c) inspector;
(d) timekeeper; or (e) other officials deemed necessary by the department.

(4) ((Any license
may be revoked, suspended, or denied by the director for a violation of this
chapter or a rule adopted by the director.

(5))) No person shall participate or serve in any of
the above capacities unless licensed as provided in this chapter.

(((6))) (5)
The referees, judges, timekeepers, event physicians, and inspectors for any
boxing event shall be designated by the department from among licensed
officials.

(((7))) (6)
The referee for any wrestling event shall be provided by the promoter and shall
be licensed as a wrestling participant.

(((8))) (7)
The department shall immediately suspend the license or certificate of a person
who has been certified pursuant to RCW 74.20A.320 by the department of social
and health services as a person who is not in compliance with a support order.
If the person has continued to meet all other requirements for reinstatement
during the suspension, reissuance of the license or certificate shall be
automatic upon the department's receipt of a release issued by the department
of social and health services stating that the licensee is in compliance with
the order.

(((9))) (8)
A person may not be issued a license if the person has an unpaid fine
outstanding to the department.

(((10))) (9)
A person may not be issued a license unless they are at least eighteen years of
age.

(((11))) (10)
This section shall not apply to contestants or participants in events at which
only amateurs are engaged in contests and/or fraternal organizations and/or
veterans' organizations chartered by congress or the defense department or any
recognized amateur sanctioning body recognized by the department, holding and
promoting athletic events and where all funds are used primarily for the
benefit of their members. Upon request of the department, a promoter,
contestant, or participant shall provide sufficient information to reasonably
determine whether this chapter applies.

Sec. 310. RCW 67.08.110 and 1999 c
282 s 8 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) Any person or any
member of any group of persons or corporation promoting boxing events who shall
participate directly or indirectly in the purse or fee of any manager of any
boxers or any boxer and any licensee who shall conduct or participate in any
sham or fake boxing event ((shall be subject to license suspension,
revocation, or fine and such revoked, suspended, or fined licensee shall not be
entitled to receive any license issued under this chapter)) has engaged
in unprofessional conduct and is subject to the sanctions specified in section
112 of this act.

(2) A manager of any boxer,
kickboxer, or martial arts participant who allows any person or any group of
persons or corporation promoting boxing, kickboxing, or martial arts events to
participate directly or indirectly in the purse or fee, or any boxer,
kickboxer, or martial arts participant or other licensee who conducts or
participates in any sham or fake boxing, kickboxing, or martial arts event has
engaged in unprofessional conduct and is subject to ((disciplinary
action under RCW 67.08.240)) the sanctions specified in section 112 of
this act.

Sec. 311. RCW 67.08.130 and 1997 c
205 s 13 are each amended to read as follows:

Whenever any licensee
shall fail to make a report of any event within the time prescribed by this
chapter or when such report is unsatisfactory to the department, the director
may examine the books and records of such licensee; he or she may subpoena and
examine under oath any officer of such licensee and such other person or
persons as he or she may deem necessary to a determination of the total gross
receipts from any event and the amount of tax thereon. If, upon the completion
of such examination it shall be determined that an additional tax is due,
notice thereof shall be served upon the licensee, ((and if such licensee
shall fail)) providing the licensee with an opportunity to request a
hearing under chapter 34.05 RCW. The failure to request a hearing within
twenty days of service of the notice constitutes a default, whereupon the
director will enter a decision on the facts available. Failure to pay such
additional tax within twenty days after service of ((such notice such
delinquent)) a final order constitutes unprofessional conduct and the
licensee ((shall)) may be subject to ((revocation of)) disciplinary
action against its license and shall be disqualified from receiving any new
license. ((In addition, such licensee shall be liable to this state in the
penal sum of one thousand dollars to be collected by the attorney general by
civil action in the name of the state in the manner provided by law.))

Sec. 312. RCW 67.08.140 and 1997 c
205 s 14 are each amended to read as follows:

Any person, club, corporation,
organization, association, fraternal society, participant, or promoter
conducting or participating in boxing or wrestling events within this state
without having first obtained a license therefor in the manner provided by this
chapter is in violation of this chapter and shall be guilty of a misdemeanor
excepting the events excluded from the operation of this chapter by RCW
67.08.015. ((The attorney general, each prosecuting attorney, the
department, or any citizen of any county where any person, club, corporation,
organization, association, fraternal society, promoter, or participant shall
threaten to hold, or appears likely to hold or participate in athletic events
in violation of this chapter, may in accordance with the laws of this state governing
injunctions, enjoin such person, club, corporation, organization, association,
fraternal society, promoter, or participant from holding or participating in
the event.))

Sec. 313. RCW 67.08.180 and 1997 c
205 s 16 are each amended to read as follows:

In addition to the
unprofessional conduct specified in section 114 of this act, the following
conduct, acts, or conditions constitute unprofessional conduct for which
disciplinary action may be taken:

(1) ((It is a
violation of this chapter for any promoter or person associated with or
employed by any promoter to destroy)) Destruction of any ticket or
ticket stub, whether sold or unsold, within three months after the date of any
event, by any promoter or person associated with or employed by any promoter.

(2) ((It is a
violation of this chapter for a wrestling participant to deliberately cut
himself or herself or otherwise mutilate himself or herself)) The
deliberate cutting of himself or herself or other self mutilation by a
wrestling participant while participating in a wrestling event.

(3) ((The department
shall revoke the license of a licensee convicted)) A conviction
under chapter 69.50 RCW.

(4) ((The director
shall revoke the license of a licensee)) Testing positive for
illegal use of a controlled substance as defined in RCW 69.50.101((, and
shall deny the application of an applicant testing positive for a controlled
substance as defined in RCW 69.50.101)).

(5) The striking of any
person that is not a licensed participant at a wrestling event ((constitutes
grounds for suspension, fine, revocation, or any combination thereof)).

Sec. 314. RCW 67.08.300 and 1997 c
205 s 24 are each amended to read as follows:

The director or
individuals acting on the director's behalf are immune from suit in an action,
civil or criminal, based on ((disciplinary proceedings or other))
official acts performed in the course of their duties in the administration and
enforcement of this chapter.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
315. A new section is added
to chapter 67.08 RCW to read as follows:

The uniform regulation
of business and professions act, chapter 18.--- RCW (sections 101 through 124
of this act), governs unlicensed practice, the issuance and denial of licenses,
and the discipline of licensees under this chapter.

Sec. 316. RCW 68.05.105 and 1987 c
331 s 10 are each amended to read as follows:

In addition to the
authority in section 104 of this act, the board has the following
authority:

(1) To adopt, amend,
and rescind such rules as are deemed necessary to carry out this title; and

(2) ((To investigate
all complaints or reports of unprofessional conduct as defined in this chapter
and to hold hearings;

(3) To issue
subpoenas and administer oaths in connection with any investigation, hearing,
or proceeding held under this title;

(4) To take or cause
depositions to be taken and use other discovery procedures as needed in any investigation,
hearing, or proceeding held under this title;

(5) To compel
attendance of witnesses at hearings;

(6) In the course of
investigating a complaint, to conduct practice reviews;

(7) To take
emergency action pending proceedings by the board;

(8) To use the
office of administrative hearings as authorized in chapter 34.12 RCW to conduct
hearings. However, the board shall make the final decision;

(9) To use
consultants or individual members of the board to assist in the direction of
investigations and issuance of statements of charges. However, those board
members shall not subsequently participate in the hearing of the case;

(10) To enter into
contracts for professional services determined to be necessary for adequate
enforcement of this title;

(11) To contract
with persons or organizations to provide services necessary for the monitoring
and supervision of licensees, or authorities who are for any authorized purpose
subject to monitoring by the board;

(12))) To adopt standards of professional conduct or
practice((;

(13) To grant or
deny authorities or license applications, and in the event of a finding of
unprofessional conduct by an applicant, authority, or license holder, to impose
any sanction against a license applicant, authority, or license holder provided
by this title;

(14) To enter into
an assurance of discontinuance in lieu of issuing a statement of charges or
conducting a hearing. The assurance shall consist of a statement of the law in
question and an agreement to not violate the stated provision. The applicant,
holder of an authority to operate, or license holder shall not be required to
admit to any violation of the law, nor shall the assurance be construed as such
an admission. Violation of an assurance under this subsection is grounds for
disciplinary action;

(15) To revoke the
license or authority;

(16) To suspend the
license or authority for a fixed or indefinite term;

(17) To restrict or
limit the license or authority;

(18) To censure or
reprimand;

(19) To cause compliance
with conditions of probation for a designated period of time;

(20) To fine for
each violation of this title, not to exceed one thousand dollars per
violation. Funds received shall be placed in the cemetery account;

(21) To order
corrective action.

Any of the actions
under this section may be totally or partly stayed by the board. In
determining what action is appropriate, the board must first consider what
sanctions are necessary to protect or compensate the public. All costs
associated with compliance with orders issued under this section are the
obligation of the license or authority holder or applicant)).

Sec. 317. RCW 68.05.170 and 1987 c
331 s 23 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) Whenever the board
finds, after notice and hearing, that any endowment care funds have been
invested in violation of this title, it ((shall)) may by written
order mailed to the person or body in charge of the fund require the
reinvestment of the funds in conformity with this title within the period
specified by it which shall be not more than six months. Such period may be
extended by the board in its discretion.

(2) The board may bring
actions for the preservation and protection of endowment care funds in the
superior court of the county in which the cemetery is located and the court
shall appoint substitute trustees and make any other order which may be
necessary for the preservation, protection, and recovery of endowment
care funds, whenever a cemetery authority or the trustees of its fund have:

(a) Transferred or
attempted to transfer any property to, or made any loan from, the endowment
care funds for the benefit of the cemetery authority or any director, officer,
agent or employee of the cemetery authority or trustee of any endowment care
funds; or,

(b) Failed to reinvest
endowment care funds in accordance with a board order issued under subsection
((one)) (1) of this section; or,

(c) Invested endowment
care funds in violation of this title; or,

(d) Taken action or
failed to take action to preserve and protect the endowment care funds,
evidencing a lack of concern therefor; or,

(e) Become financially
irresponsible or transferred control of the cemetery authority to any person
who, or business entity which, is financially irresponsible; or,

(f) Is in danger of
becoming insolvent or has gone into bankruptcy or receivership; or,

(g) Taken any action in
violation of Title 68 RCW or failed to take action required by Title 68 RCW or
has failed to comply with lawful rules((, regulations)) and orders of
the board.

(3) Whenever the board
or its representative has reason to believe that endowment care funds or
prearrangement trust funds are in danger of being lost or dissipated during the
time required for notice and hearing, it may immediately impound or seize
documents, financial instruments, or other trust fund assets, or take other
actions deemed necessary under the circumstances for the preservation and
protection of endowment care funds or prearrangement trust funds, including,
but not limited to, immediate substitutions of trustees.

Sec. 318. RCW 68.05.235 and 1987 c
331 s 19 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) Each authorized
cemetery authority shall within ninety days after the close of its accounting
year file with the board upon the board's request a true and accurate statement
of its financial condition, transactions, and affairs for the preceding year.
The statement shall be on such forms and shall contain such information as
required by this chapter and by the board.

(2) The failure to
file a statement as required under subsection (1) of this section constitutes
unprofessional conduct for which the board ((shall suspend or revoke))
may take disciplinary action against the prearrangement sales license of
((any)) the cemetery authority ((which fails to comply with
the request)). In addition, the board may take disciplinary action
against any other license held by the cemetery authority.

Sec. 319. RCW 68.05.259 and 1987 c
331 s 22 are each amended to read as follows:

If any cemetery
authority refuses to pay any examination expenses within thirty days of
completion of the examination or refuses to pay certain examination expenses in
advance as required by the department for cause, the board ((shall revoke))
may take disciplinary action against any existing certificate of
authority. Examination expenses incurred in conjunction with a transfer of
ownership of a cemetery shall be paid by the selling entity. All examination
expense moneys collected by the department shall be paid to the ((department))
program account.

Sec. 320. RCW 68.05.300 and 1987 c
331 s 25 are each amended to read as follows:

((The board may
revoke, suspend, or terminate a certificate of authority or prearrangement
sales license if a)) In addition to the unprofessional conduct described
in section 114 of this act, the board may take disciplinary action if the
cemetery authority:

(1) Fails to comply
with any provision of this chapter or any proper order or regulation of the
board;

(2) Is found by the
board to be in such condition that further execution of prearrangement
contracts would be hazardous to purchasers or beneficiaries and the people of
this state; or

(3) (( Refuses to be
examined, or refuses to submit to examination or to produce its accounts,
records, and files for examination by the board when required;

(4))) Is found by the board after investigation or
receipt of reliable information to be managed by persons who are incompetent or
untrustworthy or so lacking in managerial experience as to make the proposed or
continued operation hazardous to purchasers, beneficiaries, or the public((;
or

(5) Is found by the
board to use false, misleading, or deceptive advertisements or sales methods)).

Sec. 321. RCW 68.05.310 and 1989 c
175 s 124 are each amended to read as follows:

((The board or its
authorized representative shall give a cemetery authority notice of its
intention to suspend, revoke, or refuse to renew a certificate of authority or
a prearrangement sales license, and shall grant the cemetery authority a
hearing, in the manner required for adjudicative proceedings under chapter
34.05 RCW, the Administrative Procedure Act, before the order of suspension,
revocation, or refusal may become effective.))

No
cemetery authority whose prearrangement sales license has been ((suspended,
revoked, or refused)) the subject of disciplinary action shall be
authorized to enter into prearrangement contracts unless specifically
authorized by the board and only upon full compliance with the conditions
required by the board. Any prearrangement sale by an unlicensed cemetery
authority shall be voidable by the purchaser who shall be entitled to a full
refund.

Sec. 322. RCW 68.05.320 and 1979 c
21 s 32 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) The board or its
authorized representative may issue and serve upon a cemetery authority a
notice of charges if in the opinion of the board or its authorized
representative the cemetery authority:

(a) Is engaging in or
has engaged in practices likely to endanger the future delivery of cemetery
merchandise or services, unconstructed crypts or niches, or undeveloped graves;

(b) Is violating or has
violated any statute of the state of Washington or any rule of the board; or

(c) Is about to do an
act prohibited in (((1)))(a) or (((1)))(b) of this subsection
when the opinion is based upon reasonable cause.

(2) The notice shall
contain a statement of the facts constituting the alleged violation or practice
and shall fix a time and place at which a hearing will be held to determine
whether an order to cease and desist should issue against the cemetery
authority. The hearing shall be set not earlier than ten nor later than thirty
days after service of the notice unless a later date is set by the board or its
authorized representative at the request of the cemetery authority.

Unless the cemetery
authority appears at the hearing by a duly authorized representative it shall
be deemed to have consented to the issuance of a cease and desist order. In
the event of this consent or if upon the record made at the hearing the board
finds that any violation or practice specified in the notice of charges has
been established, the board may issue and serve upon the cemetery authority an
order to cease and desist from the violation or practice. The order may
require the cemetery authority and its directors, officers, employees, and
agents to cease and desist from the violation or practice and may require the
cemetery authority to take affirmative action to correct the conditions
resulting from the violation or practice.

(3) A cease and desist
order shall become effective at the expiration of ten days after service of the
order upon the cemetery authority except that a cease and desist order issued
upon consent shall become effective as provided in the order unless it is
stayed, modified, terminated, or set aside by action of the board or a
reviewing court.

(4) The powers of the
board under this section are in addition to the power of the board to ((refuse
to renew or to revoke or suspend)) take disciplinary action against
a cemetery authority's prearrangement sales license.

Sec. 323. RCW 68.05.330 and 1987 c
331 s 27 are each amended to read as follows:

Unless specified
otherwise in this title, any person who violates or aids or abets any person in
the violation of any of the provisions of this title shall be guilty of a class
C felony punishable under chapter 9A.20 RCW. A violation shall constitute an
unfair practice under chapter 19.86 RCW and shall be grounds for ((revocation
of)) disciplinary action against the certificate of authority under
this chapter and chapter 18.--- RCW (sections 101 through 124 of this act)
or ((revocation of)) disciplinary action against the
prearrangement sales license under this chapter and chapter 18.--- RCW
(sections 101 through 124 of this act). Retail installment transactions
under this chapter shall be governed by chapter 63.14 RCW. The provisions of
this chapter shall be cumulative and nonexclusive and shall not affect any
other remedy available at law.

Sec. 324. RCW 68.05.340 and 1987 c
331 s 28 are each amended to read as follows:

Whenever the board or
its authorized representative determines that a cemetery authority is in
violation of this title, other than engaging in unlicensed activity, or
that the continuation of acts or practices of the cemetery authority is likely
to cause insolvency or substantial dissipation of assets or earnings of the
cemetery authority's endowment care or prearrangement trust fund or to
otherwise seriously prejudice the interests of the purchasers or beneficiaries
of prearrangement contracts, the board, or its authorized representative, may
issue a temporary order requiring the cemetery authority to cease and desist
from the violation or practice. The order shall become effective upon service
on the cemetery authority and shall remain effective unless set aside, limited,
or suspended by a court in proceedings under RCW 68.05.350 or until the board
dismisses the charges specified in the notice under RCW 68.05.320 or until the
effective date of a cease and desist order issued against the cemetery authority
under RCW 68.05.320. Actions for unlicensed activity must be conducted
under section 116 of this act.

Sec. 325. RCW 68.05.350 and 1987 c
331 s 29 are each amended to read as follows:

Within ten days after a
cemetery authority has been served with a temporary cease and desist order issued
under RCW 68.05.320, the cemetery authority may apply to the superior court
in the county of its principal place of business for an injunction setting
aside, limiting, or suspending the order pending completion of the
administrative proceedings under RCW 68.05.320.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
326. A new section is added
to chapter 68.05 RCW to read as follows:

The uniform regulation
of business and professions act, chapter 18.--- RCW (sections 101 through 124
of this act), governs unlicensed practice, the issuance and denial of licenses,
and the discipline of licensees under this chapter.

Sec. 327. RCW 79A.60.480 and 2000
c 11 s 109 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) The department of
licensing ((shall)) may issue a whitewater river outfitter's
license to an applicant who submits a completed application, pays the required
fee, and complies with the requirements of this section.

(2) An applicant for a
whitewater river outfitter's license shall make application upon a form
provided by the department of licensing. The form must be submitted annually
and include the following information:

(a) The name, residence
address, and residence telephone number, and the business name, address, and
telephone number of the applicant;

(b) Certification that
all employees, subcontractors, or independent contractors hired as guides meet
training standards under RCW 79A.60.430 before carrying any passengers for
hire;

(c) Proof that the
applicant has liability insurance for a minimum of three hundred thousand
dollars per claim for occurrences by the applicant and the applicant's
employees that result in bodily injury or property damage. All guides must be
covered by the applicant's insurance policy;

(d) Certification that
the applicant will maintain the insurance for a period of not less than one
year from the date of issuance of the license; and

(e) Certification by
the applicant that for a period of not less than twenty-four months immediately
preceding the application the applicant:

(i) Has not had a
license, permit, or certificate to carry passengers for hire on a river revoked
by another state or by an agency of the government of the United States due to
a conviction for a violation of safety or insurance coverage requirements no
more stringent than the requirements of this chapter; and

(ii) Has not been
denied the right to apply for a license, permit, or certificate to carry
passengers for hire on a river by another state.

(3) The department of
licensing shall charge a fee for each application, to be set in accordance with
RCW 43.24.086.

(4) Any person
advertising or representing himself or herself as a whitewater river outfitter
who is not currently licensed is guilty of a gross misdemeanor.

(5) The department of
licensing shall submit annually a list of licensed persons and companies to the
department of community, trade, and economic development, tourism promotion
division.

(6) If an insurance
company cancels or refuses to renew insurance for a licensee, the insurance
company shall notify the department of licensing in writing of the termination
of coverage and its effective date not less than thirty days before the
effective date of termination.

(a) Upon receipt of an
insurance company termination notice, the department of licensing shall send
written notice to the licensee that on the effective date of termination the
department of licensing will suspend the license unless proof of insurance as
required by this section is filed with the department of licensing before the
effective date of the termination.

(b) If an insurance
company fails to give notice of coverage termination, this failure shall not have
the effect of continuing the coverage.

(c) The department of
licensing may ((suspend a license under this section)) sanction a
license under section 112 of this act if the licensee fails to maintain in
full force and effect the insurance required by this section.

(7) The state of
Washington shall be immune from any civil action arising from the issuance of a
license under this section.

Sec. 328. RCW 79A.60.490 and 2000
c 11 s 111 are each amended to read as follows:

Within five days after
conviction for any of the provisions of RCW 79A.60.430 through 79A.60.480, the
court shall forward a copy of the judgment to the department of licensing.
After receiving proof of conviction, the department of licensing may ((suspend))
sanction the license of any whitewater river outfitter ((for a period
not to exceed one year or until)) under section 112 of this act. Proof
of compliance with all licensing requirements and correction of the violation
under which the whitewater river outfitter was convicted may be considered
by the department as mitigating factors when taking disciplinary action.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
329. A new section is added
to chapter 79A.60 RCW to read as follows:

The uniform regulation
of business and professions act, chapter 18.--- RCW (sections 101 through 124
of this act), governs unlicensed practice, the issuance and denial of licenses,
and the discipline of licensees under this chapter.

PART 3

NEW SECTION. Sec.
401. The following acts or
parts of acts are each repealed:

(1) RCW 18.08.450 (Actions against
certificate--Discipline--Board's authority--Procedure) and 1989 c 175 s 59
& 1985 c 37 s 16;

(2) RCW 18.39.400 (Disciplinary authority of
board--Rules) and 1994 c 17 s 2;

(3) RCW 18.39.430 (Statement of charge of
violation--Notice--Hearing) and 1994 c 17 s 5;

(4) RCW 18.39.440
(Hearings--Procedures--Administrative Procedure Act) and 1994 c 17 s 6;

(5) RCW 18.39.460 (Actions against
license--Exceptions) and 1994 c 17 s 8;

(6) RCW 18.39.470 (Order--When
effective--Stay) and 1994 c 17 s 9;

(7) RCW 18.39.480 (Appeal) and 1994 c 17 s
10;

(8) RCW 18.39.490
(Reinstatement--Hearings--Examination) and 1994 c 17 s 11;

(9) RCW 18.39.500 (Finding of unprofessional
conduct--Order--Sanctions--Stay--Costs) and 1994 c 17 s 12;

(10) RCW 18.39.510 (Informal
disposal--Statement of allegations--Summary of
evidence--Stipulation--Sanctions--Disclosure--Enforcement) and 2000 c 171 s 11 &
1994 c 17 s 13;

(11) RCW 18.39.520 (Enforcement of fine) and
1994 c 17 s 14;

(12) RCW 18.39.540 (Violation of
injunction--Penalties) and 1994 c 17 s 16;

(13) RCW 18.39.550 (Crime by license,
registration, endorsement, or permit holder--Notice by board) and 1994 c 17 s
17;

(14) RCW 18.43.140 (Injunctive relief,
proof--Board's immunity from liability--Prosecutions) and 1959 c 297 s 3;

(15) RCW 18.85.251 (Disciplinary
action--Procedure--Investigation--Hearing) and 1988 c 205 s 7, 1987 c 332 s 11,
1981 c 67 s 22, & 1951 c 222 s 23;

(16) RCW 18.85.360 (Witnesses--Depositions--Fees--Subpoenas)
and 1997 c 322 s 25 & 1957 c 52 s 49;

(17) RCW 18.96.130 (Charges against
registrants--Hearings--Findings--Penalties) and 1985 c 18 s 4 & 1969 ex.s.
c 158 s 13;

(18) RCW 18.140.180
(Hearings--Orders--Judicial review) and 1993 c 30 s 20 & 1989 c 414 s 22;

(19) RCW 18.165.190 (Violations--Statement of
charges--Hearings) and 1995 c 277 s 37 & 1991 c 328 s 19;

(20) RCW 18.165.200 (Application of
administrative procedure act to hearings) and 1991 c 328 s 20;

(21) RCW 18.165.240 (Unlicensed
practice--Complaints--Director's authority--Injunctions--Penalty) and 1995 c
277 s 39 & 1991 c 328 s 24;

(22) RCW 18.165.250 (Violation of
injunction--Penalty) and 1991 c 328 s 25;

(23) RCW 18.165.260 (Immunity) and 1991 c 328
s 26;

(24) RCW 18.170.190
(Complaints--Investigation--Immunity) and 1995 c 277 s 14 & 1991 c 334 s
19;

(25) RCW 18.170.200 (Violations--Statement of
charges--Hearings) and 1991 c 334 s 20;

(26) RCW 18.170.240 (Enforcement of orders for
payment of fines) and 1991 c 334 s 24;

(27) RCW 18.170.250 (Unlicensed
practice--Complaints--Director's authority--Injunctions--Penalty) and 1995 c
277 s 16 & 1991 c 334 s 25;

(28) RCW 18.170.260 (Violation of injunction--Penalty)
and 1991 c 334 s 26;

(29) RCW 18.170.270 (Immunity) and 1991 c 334
s 27;

(30) RCW 18.185.150 (Hearing procedures) and
1993 c 260 s 16;

(31) RCW 18.185.160 (Enforcement of monetary
penalty) and 1993 c 260 s 17;

(32) RCW 18.185.180 (Civil penalties) and 1993
c 260 s 19;

(33) RCW 18.185.190 (Official immunity) and
1993 c 260 s 20;

(34) RCW 19.16.360 (Licenses--Denial,
suspension, revocation or refusal to renew--Civil penalty--Hearing) and 1977
ex.s. c 194 s 3, 1973 1st ex.s. c 20 s 4, & 1971 ex.s. c 253 s 27;

(35) RCW 19.16.380 (Administrative procedure
act--Application) and 1971 ex.s. c 253 s 29;

(36) RCW 19.16.400 (Investigations or
proceedings--Powers of director or designees--Contempt) and 1973 1st ex.s. c 20
s 5 & 1971 ex.s. c 253 s 31;

(37) RCW 19.105.460 (Investigations--Powers
relating to--Proceedings for contempt) and 1982 c 69 s 17;

(38) RCW 19.138.190 (Investigations--Powers of
director, officer) and 1994 c 237 s 16;

(39) RCW 19.138.210 (Violations--Cease and
desist order--Notice--Hearing) and 1994 c 237 s 17;

(40) RCW 19.138.220 (Enjoining unregistered
person--Additional to criminal liability) and 2001 c 44 s 3 & 1994 c 237 s
18;

(41) RCW 19.138.230 (Violation of
injunction--Penalties--Jurisdiction) and 1994 c 237 s 19;

(42) RCW 19.138.300 (Administrative procedure
act governs) and 1994 c 237 s 25;

(43) RCW 19.158.060 (Failure to
register--Penalty) and 1989 c 20 s 6;

(44) RCW 64.36.180 (Entry of order--Summary
order--Notice--Hearing) and 1983 1st ex.s. c 22 s 17;

(45) RCW 64.36.190 (Director's
powers--Application to superior court to compel compliance) and 1983 1st ex.s.
c 22 s 18;

(46) RCW 64.36.280 (Administration of
chapter--Delegation of powers) and 1983 1st ex.s. c 22 s 27;

(47) RCW 64.36.300 (Application of chapter
34.05 RCW) and 1983 1st ex.s. c 22 s 30;

(48) RCW 67.08.120 (Violation of
rules--Penalties) and 1999 c 282 s 9, 1997 c 205 s 12, 1993 c 278 s 22, 1989 c
127 s 12, & 1933 c 184 s 18;

(49) RCW 67.08.210 (Unprofessional
conduct--Investigation--Notice of charge--Request for hearing--Time of
hearing--Notice) and 1997 c 205 s 18;

(50) RCW 67.08.230 (Fine--Order for
payment--Enforcement--Proof of validity) and 1997 c 205 s 20;

(51) RCW 67.08.250 (Unlicensed practice or
conduct violating chapter--Investigation--Cease and desist orders--Injunction
in name of state--Criminal liability not precluded--Penalty) and 1997 c 205 s
22; and

(52) RCW 67.08.260 (Violation of
injunction--Penalties--Jurisdiction) and 1997 c 205 s 23.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
402. Part headings used in
this act are not any part of the law.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
403. (1) Sections 201 through
240 and 242 through 401 of this act take effect January 1, 2003.

(2) Section 241 of this
act takes effect July 1, 2003.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 404. If any provision of this
act or its application to any person or circumstance is held invalid, the
remainder of the act or the application of the provision to other persons or
circumstances is not affected.

---
END ---