BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF
WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1. RCW 9.94A.030 and 2001
2nd sp.s. c 12 s 301, 2001 c 300 s 3, and 2001 c 7 s 2 are each reenacted and
amended to read as follows:

Unless the context
clearly requires otherwise, the definitions in this section apply throughout
this chapter.

(1) "Board" means
the indeterminate sentence review board created under chapter 9.95 RCW.

(2)
"Collect," or any derivative thereof, "collect and remit,"
or "collect and deliver," when used with reference to the department,
means that the department, either directly or through a collection agreement
authorized by RCW 9.94A.760, is responsible for monitoring and enforcing the
offender's sentence with regard to the legal financial obligation, receiving
payment thereof from the offender, and, consistent with current law, delivering
daily the entire payment to the superior court clerk without depositing it in a
departmental account.

(3)
"Commission" means the sentencing guidelines commission.

(4) "Community
corrections officer" means an employee of the department who is responsible
for carrying out specific duties in supervision of sentenced offenders and
monitoring of sentence conditions.

(5) "Community
custody" means that portion of an offender's sentence of confinement in
lieu of earned release time or imposed pursuant to RCW 9.94A.505(2)(b),
9.94A.650 through 9.94A.670, 9.94A.690, 9.94A.700 through 9.94A.715, or
9.94A.545, served in the community subject to controls placed on the offender's
movement and activities by the department. For offenders placed on community custody
for crimes committed on or after July 1, 2000, the department shall assess the
offender's risk of reoffense and may establish and modify conditions of
community custody, in addition to those imposed by the court, based upon the
risk to community safety.

(6) "Community
custody range" means the minimum and maximum period of community custody
included as part of a sentence under RCW 9.94A.715, as established by the
commission or the legislature under RCW 9.94A.850, for crimes committed on or
after July 1, 2000.

(7) "Community
placement" means that period during which the offender is subject to the
conditions of community custody and/or postrelease supervision, which begins
either upon completion of the term of confinement (postrelease supervision) or at
such time as the offender is transferred to community custody in lieu of earned
release. Community placement may consist of entirely community custody,
entirely postrelease supervision, or a combination of the two.

(8) "Community
service" means compulsory service, without compensation, performed for the
benefit of the community by the offender.

(9) "Community
supervision" means a period of time during which a convicted offender is
subject to crime-related prohibitions and other sentence conditions imposed by
a court pursuant to this chapter or RCW 16.52.200(6) or 46.61.524. Where the
court finds that any offender has a chemical dependency that has contributed to
his or her offense, the conditions of supervision may, subject to available
resources, include treatment. For purposes of the interstate compact for
out-of-state supervision of parolees and probationers, RCW 9.95.270, community
supervision is the functional equivalent of probation and should be considered
the same as probation by other states.

(10)
"Confinement" means total or partial confinement.

(11)
"Conviction" means an adjudication of guilt pursuant to Titles 10 or
13 RCW and includes a verdict of guilty, a finding of guilty, and acceptance of
a plea of guilty.

(12)
"Crime-related prohibition" means an order of a court prohibiting
conduct that directly relates to the circumstances of the crime for which the
offender has been convicted, and shall not be construed to mean orders
directing an offender affirmatively to participate in rehabilitative programs
or to otherwise perform affirmative conduct. However, affirmative acts
necessary to monitor compliance with the order of a court may be required by
the department.

(13) "Criminal
history" means the list of a defendant's prior convictions and juvenile
adjudications, whether in this state, in federal court, or elsewhere. The
history shall include, where known, for each conviction (a) whether the
defendant has been placed on probation and the length and terms thereof; and
(b) whether the defendant has been incarcerated and the length of
incarceration.

(14) "Day
fine" means a fine imposed by the sentencing court that equals the
difference between the offender's net daily income and the reasonable
obligations that the offender has for the support of the offender and any
dependents.

(15) "Day
reporting" means a program of enhanced supervision designed to monitor the
offender's daily activities and compliance with sentence conditions, and in
which the offender is required to report daily to a specific location
designated by the department or the sentencing court.

(16)
"Department" means the department of corrections.

(17) "Determinate
sentence" means a sentence that states with exactitude the number of
actual years, months, or days of total confinement, of partial confinement, of
community supervision, the number of actual hours or days of community service
work, or dollars or terms of a legal financial obligation. The fact that an
offender through earned release can reduce the actual period of confinement
shall not affect the classification of the sentence as a determinate sentence.

(18) "Disposable
earnings" means that part of the earnings of an offender remaining after
the deduction from those earnings of any amount required by law to be withheld.
For the purposes of this definition, "earnings" means compensation
paid or payable for personal services, whether denominated as wages, salary,
commission, bonuses, or otherwise, and, notwithstanding any other provision of
law making the payments exempt from garnishment, attachment, or other process
to satisfy a court-ordered legal financial obligation, specifically includes
periodic payments pursuant to pension or retirement programs, or insurance
policies of any type, but does not include payments made under Title 50 RCW,
except as provided in RCW 50.40.020 and 50.40.050, or Title 74 RCW.

(19) "Drug
offender sentencing alternative" is a sentencing option available to
persons convicted of a felony offense other than a violent offense or a sex
offense and who are eligible for the option under RCW 9.94A.660.

(20) "Drug
offense" means:

(a) Any felony
violation of chapter 69.50 RCW except possession of a controlled substance (RCW
69.50.401(d)) or forged prescription for a controlled substance (RCW 69.50.403);

(b) Any offense defined
as a felony under federal law that relates to the possession, manufacture,
distribution, or transportation of a controlled substance; or

(c) Any out-of-state conviction
for an offense that under the laws of this state would be a felony classified
as a drug offense under (a) of this subsection.

(21) "Earned
release" means earned release from confinement as provided in RCW
9.94A.728.

(22) "Escape"
means:

(a) Sexually violent
predator escape (RCW 9A.76.115), escape in the first degree (RCW 9A.76.110),
escape in the second degree (RCW 9A.76.120), willful failure to return from
furlough (RCW 72.66.060), willful failure to return from work release (RCW
72.65.070), or willful failure to be available for supervision by the
department while in community custody (RCW 72.09.310); or

(b) Any federal or
out-of-state conviction for an offense that under the laws of this state would
be a felony classified as an escape under (a) of this subsection.

(23) "Felony
traffic offense" means:

(a) Vehicular homicide
(RCW 46.61.520), vehicular assault (RCW 46.61.522), eluding a police officer
(RCW 46.61.024), ((or)) felony hit-and-run injury-accident (RCW
46.52.020(4)), felony driving while under the influence of intoxicating
liquor or any drug (RCW 46.61.502(6)), or felony physical control of a vehicle
while under the influence of intoxicating liquor or any drug (RCW 46.61.504(6));
or

(b) Any federal or
out-of-state conviction for an offense that under the laws of this state would
be a felony classified as a felony traffic offense under (a) of this
subsection.

(24) "Fine"
means a specific sum of money ordered by the sentencing court to be paid by the
offender to the court over a specific period of time.

(25) "First-time
offender" means any person who has no prior convictions for a felony and
is eligible for the first-time offender waiver under RCW 9.94A.650.

(26) "Home
detention" means a program of partial confinement available to offenders
wherein the offender is confined in a private residence subject to electronic
surveillance.

(27) "Legal
financial obligation" means a sum of money that is ordered by a superior
court of the state of Washington for legal financial obligations which may
include restitution to the victim, statutorily imposed crime victims'
compensation fees as assessed pursuant to RCW 7.68.035, court costs, county or
interlocal drug funds, court-appointed attorneys' fees, and costs of defense,
fines, and any other financial obligation that is assessed to the offender as a
result of a felony conviction. Upon conviction for vehicular assault while
under the influence of intoxicating liquor or any drug, RCW 46.61.522(1)(b), or
vehicular homicide while under the influence of intoxicating liquor or any
drug, RCW 46.61.520(1)(a), legal financial obligations may also include payment
to a public agency of the expense of an emergency response to the incident
resulting in the conviction, subject to RCW 38.52.430.

(28) "Most serious
offense" means any of the following felonies or a felony attempt to commit
any of the following felonies:

(a) Any felony defined
under any law as a class A felony or criminal solicitation of or criminal
conspiracy to commit a class A felony;

(b) Assault in the
second degree;

(c) Assault of a child
in the second degree;

(d) Child molestation
in the second degree;

(e) Controlled
substance homicide;

(f) Extortion in the
first degree;

(g) Incest when
committed against a child under age fourteen;

(h) Indecent liberties;

(i) Kidnapping in the
second degree;

(j) Leading organized
crime;

(k) Manslaughter in the
first degree;

(l) Manslaughter in the
second degree;

(m) Promoting
prostitution in the first degree;

(n) Rape in the third
degree;

(o) Robbery in the
second degree;

(p) Sexual
exploitation;

(q) Vehicular assault,
when caused by the operation or driving of a vehicle by a person while under
the influence of intoxicating liquor or any drug or by the operation or driving
of a vehicle in a reckless manner;

(r) Vehicular homicide,
when proximately caused by the driving of any vehicle by any person while under
the influence of intoxicating liquor or any drug as defined by RCW 46.61.502,
or by the operation of any vehicle in a reckless manner;

(s) Any other class B
felony offense with a finding of sexual motivation;

(t) Any other felony
with a deadly weapon verdict under RCW 9.94A.602;

(u) Any felony offense
in effect at any time prior to December 2, 1993, that is comparable to a most
serious offense under this subsection, or any federal or out-of-state
conviction for an offense that under the laws of this state would be a felony
classified as a most serious offense under this subsection;

(v)(i) A prior
conviction for indecent liberties under RCW 9A.88.100(1) (a), (b), and (c),
chapter 260, Laws of 1975 1st ex. sess. as it existed until July 1, 1979, RCW
9A.44.100(1) (a), (b), and (c) as it existed from July 1, 1979, until June 11,
1986, and RCW 9A.44.100(1) (a), (b), and (d) as it existed from June 11, 1986,
until July 1, 1988;

(ii) A prior conviction
for indecent liberties under RCW 9A.44.100(1)(c) as it existed from June 11,
1986, until July 1, 1988, if: (A) The crime was committed against a child
under the age of fourteen; or (B) the relationship between the victim and
perpetrator is included in the definition of indecent liberties under RCW
9A.44.100(1)(c) as it existed from July 1, 1988, through July 27, 1997, or RCW
9A.44.100(1) (d) or (e) as it existed from July 25, 1993, through July 27,
1997.

(29) "Nonviolent
offense" means an offense which is not a violent offense.

(30)
"Offender" means a person who has committed a felony established by
state law and is eighteen years of age or older or is less than eighteen years
of age but whose case is under superior court jurisdiction under RCW 13.04.030
or has been transferred by the appropriate juvenile court to a criminal court
pursuant to RCW 13.40.110. Throughout this chapter, the terms
"offender" and "defendant" are used interchangeably.

(31) "Partial
confinement" means confinement for no more than one year in a facility or
institution operated or utilized under contract by the state or any other unit
of government, or, if home detention or work crew has been ordered by the court,
in an approved residence, for a substantial portion of each day with the
balance of the day spent in the community. Partial confinement includes work
release, home detention, work crew, and a combination of work crew and home
detention.

(32) "Persistent
offender" is an offender who:

(a)(i) Has been
convicted in this state of any felony considered a most serious offense; and

(ii) Has, before the
commission of the offense under (a) of this subsection, been convicted as an
offender on at least two separate occasions, whether in this state or
elsewhere, of felonies that under the laws of this state would be considered
most serious offenses and would be included in the offender score under RCW
9.94A.525; provided that of the two or more previous convictions, at least one
conviction must have occurred before the commission of any of the other most
serious offenses for which the offender was previously convicted; or

(b)(i) Has been
convicted of: (A) Rape in the first degree, rape of a child in the first
degree, child molestation in the first degree, rape in the second degree, rape
of a child in the second degree, or indecent liberties by forcible compulsion;
(B) any of the following offenses with a finding of sexual motivation: Murder
in the first degree, murder in the second degree, homicide by abuse, kidnapping
in the first degree, kidnapping in the second degree, assault in the first
degree, assault in the second degree, assault of a child in the first degree,
or burglary in the first degree; or (C) an attempt to commit any crime listed
in this subsection (32)(b)(i); and

(ii) Has, before the
commission of the offense under (b)(i) of this subsection, been convicted as an
offender on at least one occasion, whether in this state or elsewhere, of an
offense listed in (b)(i) of this subsection or any federal or out-of-state
offense or offense under prior Washington law that is comparable to the
offenses listed in (b)(i) of this subsection. A conviction for rape of a child
in the first degree constitutes a conviction under (b)(i) of this subsection
only when the offender was sixteen years of age or older when the offender
committed the offense. A conviction for rape of a child in the second degree
constitutes a conviction under (b)(i) of this subsection only when the offender
was eighteen years of age or older when the offender committed the offense.

(33) "Postrelease
supervision" is that portion of an offender's community placement that is
not community custody.

(34)
"Restitution" means a specific sum of money ordered by the sentencing
court to be paid by the offender to the court over a specified period of time
as payment of damages. The sum may include both public and private costs.

(35) "Risk
assessment" means the application of an objective instrument supported by
research and adopted by the department for the purpose of assessing an
offender's risk of reoffense, taking into consideration the nature of the harm
done by the offender, place and circumstances of the offender related to risk,
the offender's relationship to any victim, and any information provided to the
department by victims. The results of a risk assessment shall not be based on
unconfirmed or unconfirmable allegations.

(36) "Serious
traffic offense" means:

(a) Nonfelony driving
while under the influence of intoxicating liquor or any drug (RCW 46.61.502), nonfelony
actual physical control while under the influence of intoxicating liquor or any
drug (RCW 46.61.504), reckless driving (RCW 46.61.500), or hit-and-run an
attended vehicle (RCW 46.52.020(5)); or

(b) Any federal,
out-of-state, county, or municipal conviction for an offense that under the
laws of this state would be classified as a serious traffic offense under (a)
of this subsection.

(37) "Serious
violent offense" is a subcategory of violent offense and means:

(a)(i) Murder in the
first degree;

(ii) Homicide by abuse;

(iii) Murder in the
second degree;

(iv) Manslaughter in
the first degree;

(v) Assault in the
first degree;

(vi) Kidnapping in the
first degree;

(vii) Rape in the first
degree;

(viii) Assault of a
child in the first degree; or

(ix) An attempt,
criminal solicitation, or criminal conspiracy to commit one of these felonies;
or

(b) Any federal or
out-of-state conviction for an offense that under the laws of this state would
be a felony classified as a serious violent offense under (a) of this
subsection.

(38) "Sex
offense" means:

(a)(i) A felony that is
a violation of chapter 9A.44 RCW other than RCW 9A.44.130(11);

(ii) A violation of RCW
9A.64.020;

(iii) A felony that is
a violation of chapter 9.68A RCW other than RCW 9.68A.070 or 9.68A.080; or

(iv) A felony that is,
under chapter 9A.28 RCW, a criminal attempt, criminal solicitation, or criminal
conspiracy to commit such crimes;

(b) Any conviction for
a felony offense in effect at any time prior to July 1, 1976, that is
comparable to a felony classified as a sex offense in (a) of this subsection;

(c) A felony with a
finding of sexual motivation under RCW 9.94A.835 or 13.40.135; or

(d) Any federal or
out-of-state conviction for an offense that under the laws of this state would
be a felony classified as a sex offense under (a) of this subsection.

(39) "Sexual
motivation" means that one of the purposes for which the defendant
committed the crime was for the purpose of his or her sexual gratification.

(40) "Standard
sentence range" means the sentencing court's discretionary range in
imposing a nonappealable sentence.

(41) "Statutory
maximum sentence" means the maximum length of time for which an offender
may be confined as punishment for a crime as prescribed in chapter 9A.20 RCW,
RCW 9.92.010, the statute defining the crime, or other statute defining the
maximum penalty for a crime.

(42) "Total
confinement" means confinement inside the physical boundaries of a
facility or institution operated or utilized under contract by the state or any
other unit of government for twenty-four hours a day, or pursuant to RCW
72.64.050 and 72.64.060.

(43) "Transition
training" means written and verbal instructions and assistance provided by
the department to the offender during the two weeks prior to the offender's
successful completion of the work ethic camp program. The transition training
shall include instructions in the offender's requirements and obligations
during the offender's period of community custody.

(44) "Victim"
means any person who has sustained emotional, psychological, physical, or
financial injury to person or property as a direct result of the crime charged.

(45) "Violent
offense" means:

(a) Any of the
following felonies:

(i) Any felony defined
under any law as a class A felony or an attempt to commit a class A felony;

(ii) Criminal
solicitation of or criminal conspiracy to commit a class A felony;

(iii) Manslaughter in
the first degree;

(iv) Manslaughter in
the second degree;

(v) Indecent liberties
if committed by forcible compulsion;

(vi) Kidnapping in the
second degree;

(vii) Arson in the
second degree;

(viii) Assault in the
second degree;

(ix) Assault of a child
in the second degree;

(x) Extortion in the
first degree;

(xi) Robbery in the
second degree;

(xii) Drive-by
shooting;

(xiii) Vehicular
assault, when caused by the operation or driving of a vehicle by a person while
under the influence of intoxicating liquor or any drug or by the operation or
driving of a vehicle in a reckless manner; and

(xiv) Vehicular
homicide, when proximately caused by the driving of any vehicle by any person
while under the influence of intoxicating liquor or any drug as defined by RCW
46.61.502, or by the operation of any vehicle in a reckless manner;

(b) Any conviction for
a felony offense in effect at any time prior to July 1, 1976, that is
comparable to a felony classified as a violent offense in (a) of this subsection;
and

(c) Any federal or
out-of-state conviction for an offense that under the laws of this state would
be a felony classified as a violent offense under (a) or (b) of this
subsection.

(46) "Work
crew" means a program of partial confinement consisting of civic
improvement tasks for the benefit of the community that complies with RCW
9.94A.725.

(47) "Work ethic
camp" means an alternative incarceration program as provided in RCW
9.94A.690 designed to reduce recidivism and lower the cost of corrections by
requiring offenders to complete a comprehensive array of real-world job and
vocational experiences, character-building work ethics training, life
management skills development, substance abuse rehabilitation, counseling,
literacy training, and basic adult education.

(48) "Work
release" means a program of partial confinement available to offenders who
are employed or engaged as a student in a regular course of study at school.

Sec. 2. RCW 9.94A.640 and 1987 c
486 s 7 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) Every offender who
has been discharged under RCW 9.94A.637 may apply to the sentencing court for a
vacation of the offender's record of conviction. If the court finds the
offender meets the tests prescribed in subsection (2) of this section, the
court may clear the record of conviction by: (a) Permitting the offender to
withdraw the offender's plea of guilty and to enter a plea of not guilty; or
(b) if the offender has been convicted after a plea of not guilty, by the court
setting aside the verdict of guilty; and (c) by the court dismissing the
information or indictment against the offender.

(2) An offender may not
have the record of conviction cleared if: (a) There are any criminal charges
against the offender pending in any court of this state or another state, or in
any federal court; (b) the offense was a violent offense as defined in RCW
9.94A.030; (c) the offense was a crime against persons as defined in RCW
43.43.830; (d) the offender has been convicted of a new crime in this state,
another state, or federal court since the date of the offender's discharge
under RCW 9.94A.637; (e) the offense is a class B felony and less than ten
years have passed since the date the applicant was discharged under RCW
9.94A.637; ((and)) (f) the offense was a class C felony, other than a
class C felony described in RCW 46.61.502(6) or 46.61.504(6), and less than
five years have passed since the date the applicant was discharged under RCW
9.94A.637; or (g) the offense was a class C felony described in RCW
46.61.502(6) or 46.61.504(6) and less than seven years have passed since the
applicant was discharged under RCW 9.94A.637.

(3) Once the court
vacates a record of conviction under subsection (1) of this section, the fact
that the offender has been convicted of the offense shall not be included in
the offender's criminal history for purposes of determining a sentence in any
subsequent conviction, and the offender shall be released from all penalties
and disabilities resulting from the offense. For all purposes, including
responding to questions on employment applications, an offender whose
conviction has been vacated may state that the offender has never been
convicted of that crime. Nothing in this section affects or prevents the use
of an offender's prior conviction in a later criminal prosecution.

Sec. 3. RCW 9.94A.515 and 2001
2nd sp.s. c 12 s 361, 2001 c 300 s 4, 2001 c 217 s 12, and 2001 c 17 s 1 are
each reenacted and amended to read as follows:

TABLE
2

CRIMES
INCLUDED WITHIN EACH SERIOUSNESS LEVEL

XVIAggravated
Murder 1 (RCW 10.95.020)

XVHomicide
by abuse (RCW 9A.32.055)

Malicious
explosion 1 (RCW 70.74.280(1))

Murder
1 (RCW 9A.32.030)

XIVMurder
2 (RCW 9A.32.050)

XIIIMalicious
explosion 2 (RCW 70.74.280(2))

Malicious
placement of an explosive 1 (RCW 70.74.270(1))

XIIAssault
1 (RCW 9A.36.011)

Assault
of a Child 1 (RCW 9A.36.120)

Malicious
placement of an imitation device 1 (RCW 70.74.272(1)(a))

Rape
1 (RCW 9A.44.040)

Rape
of a Child 1 (RCW 9A.44.073)

XIManslaughter
1 (RCW 9A.32.060)

Rape
2 (RCW 9A.44.050)

Rape
of a Child 2 (RCW 9A.44.076)

XChild
Molestation 1 (RCW 9A.44.083)

Indecent
Liberties (with forcible compulsion) (RCW 9A.44.100(1)(a))

Kidnapping
1 (RCW 9A.40.020)

Leading
Organized Crime (RCW 9A.82.060(1)(a))

Malicious
explosion 3 (RCW 70.74.280(3))

Manufacture
of methamphetamine (RCW 69.50.401(a)(1)(ii))

Over
18 and deliver heroin, methamphetamine, a narcotic from Schedule I or II, or
flunitrazepam from Schedule IV to someone under 18 (RCW 69.50.406)

Sexually
Violent Predator Escape (RCW 9A.76.115)

IXAssault
of a Child 2 (RCW 9A.36.130)

Controlled
Substance Homicide (RCW 69.50.415)

Explosive
devices prohibited (RCW 70.74.180)

Hit
and Run‑-Death (RCW 46.52.020(4)(a))

Homicide
by Watercraft, by being under the influence of intoxicating liquor or any drug
(RCW 79A.60.050)

Inciting
Criminal Profiteering (RCW 9A.82.060(1)(b))

Malicious
placement of an explosive 2 (RCW 70.74.270(2))

Over
18 and deliver narcotic from Schedule III, IV, or V or a nonnarcotic, except
flunitrazepam or methamphetamine, from Schedule I-V to someone under 18 and 3
years junior (RCW 69.50.406)

Robbery
1 (RCW 9A.56.200)

Sexual
Exploitation (RCW 9.68A.040)

Vehicular
Homicide, by being under the influence of intoxicating liquor or any drug (RCW
46.61.520)

VIIIArson
1 (RCW 9A.48.020)

Deliver
or possess with intent to deliver methamphetamine (RCW 69.50.401(a)(1)(ii))

Homicide
by Watercraft, by the operation of any vessel in a reckless manner (RCW
79A.60.050)

Manslaughter
2 (RCW 9A.32.070)

Manufacture,
deliver, or possess with intent to deliver amphetamine (RCW
69.50.401(a)(1)(ii))

Manufacture,
deliver, or possess with intent to deliver heroin or cocaine (RCW
69.50.401(a)(1)(i))

Possession
of Ephedrine, Pseudoephedrine, or Anhydrous Ammonia with intent to manufacture
methamphetamine (RCW 69.50.440)

Promoting
Prostitution 1 (RCW 9A.88.070)

Selling
for profit (controlled or counterfeit) any controlled substance (RCW 69.50.410)

Theft
of Anhydrous Ammonia (RCW 69.55.010)

Vehicular
Homicide, by the operation of any vehicle in a reckless manner (RCW 46.61.520)

VIIBurglary
1 (RCW 9A.52.020)

Child
Molestation 2 (RCW 9A.44.086)

Dealing
in depictions of minor engaged in sexually explicit conduct (RCW 9.68A.050)

Drive-by
Shooting (RCW 9A.36.045)

Homicide
by Watercraft, by disregard for the safety of others (RCW 79A.60.050)

Indecent
Liberties (without forcible compulsion) (RCW 9A.44.100(1) (b) and (c))

Introducing
Contraband 1 (RCW 9A.76.140)

Involving
a minor in drug dealing (RCW 69.50.401(f))

Malicious
placement of an explosive 3 (RCW 70.74.270(3))

Sending,
bringing into state depictions of minor engaged in sexually explicit conduct
(RCW 9.68A.060)

Unlawful
Possession of a Firearm in the first degree (RCW 9.41.040(1)(a))

Use
of a Machine Gun in Commission of a Felony (RCW 9.41.225)

Vehicular
Homicide, by disregard for the safety of others (RCW 46.61.520)

VIBail
Jumping with Murder 1 (RCW 9A.76.170(3)(a))

Bribery
(RCW 9A.68.010)

Incest
1 (RCW 9A.64.020(1))

Intimidating
a Judge (RCW 9A.72.160)

Intimidating
a Juror/Witness (RCW 9A.72.110, 9A.72.130)

Malicious
placement of an imitation device 2 (RCW 70.74.272(1)(b))

Manufacture,
deliver, or possess with intent to deliver narcotics from Schedule I or II
(except heroin or cocaine) or flunitrazepam from Schedule IV (RCW
69.50.401(a)(1)(i))

Rape
of a Child 3 (RCW 9A.44.079)

Theft
of a Firearm (RCW 9A.56.300)

Unlawful
Storage of Anhydrous Ammonia (RCW 69.55.020)

VAbandonment
of dependent person 1 (RCW 9A.42.060)

Advancing
money or property for extortionate extension of credit (RCW 9A.82.030)

Bail
Jumping with class A Felony (RCW 9A.76.170(3)(b))

Child
Molestation 3 (RCW 9A.44.089)

Criminal
Mistreatment 1 (RCW 9A.42.020)

Custodial
Sexual Misconduct 1 (RCW 9A.44.160)

Delivery
of imitation controlled substance by person eighteen or over to person under
eighteen (RCW 69.52.030(2))

Domestic
Violence Court Order Violation (RCW 10.99.040, 10.99.050, 26.09.300, 26.10.220,
26.26.138, 26.50.110, 26.52.070, or 74.34.145)

Driving
While Under the Influence (RCW 46.61.502(6))

Extortion
1 (RCW 9A.56.120)

Extortionate
Extension of Credit (RCW 9A.82.020)

Extortionate
Means to Collect Extensions of Credit (RCW 9A.82.040)

Incest
2 (RCW 9A.64.020(2))

Kidnapping
2 (RCW 9A.40.030)

Perjury
1 (RCW 9A.72.020)

Persistent
prison misbehavior (RCW 9.94.070)

Physical
Control of a Vehicle While Under the Influence (RCW 46.61.504(6))

Possession
of a Stolen Firearm (RCW 9A.56.310)

Rape
3 (RCW 9A.44.060)

Rendering
Criminal Assistance 1 (RCW 9A.76.070)

Sexual
Misconduct with a Minor 1 (RCW 9A.44.093)

Sexually
Violating Human Remains (RCW 9A.44.105)

Stalking
(RCW 9A.46.110)

IVArson
2 (RCW 9A.48.030)

Assault
2 (RCW 9A.36.021)

Assault
by Watercraft (RCW 79A.60.060)

Bribing
a Witness/Bribe Received by Witness (RCW 9A.72.090, 9A.72.100)

Commercial
Bribery (RCW 9A.68.060)

Counterfeiting
(RCW 9.16.035(4))

Escape
1 (RCW 9A.76.110)

Hit
and Run‑-Injury (RCW 46.52.020(4)(b))

Hit
and Run with Vessel‑-Injury Accident (RCW 79A.60.200(3))

Identity
Theft 1 (RCW 9.35.020(2)(a))

Indecent
Exposure to Person Under Age Fourteen (subsequent sex offense) (RCW 9A.88.010)

Influencing
Outcome of Sporting Event (RCW 9A.82.070)

Knowingly
Trafficking in Stolen Property (RCW 9A.82.050(2))

Malicious
Harassment (RCW 9A.36.080)

Manufacture,
deliver, or possess with intent to deliver narcotics from Schedule III, IV, or
V or nonnarcotics from Schedule I-V (except marijuana, amphetamine,
methamphetamines, or flunitrazepam) (RCW 69.50.401(a)(1) (iii) through (v))

Residential
Burglary (RCW 9A.52.025)

Robbery
2 (RCW 9A.56.210)

Theft
of Livestock 1 (RCW 9A.56.080)

Threats
to Bomb (RCW 9.61.160)

Use
of Proceeds of Criminal Profiteering (RCW 9A.82.080 (1) and (2))

Vehicular
Assault, by being under the influence of intoxicating liquor or any drug, or by
the operation or driving of a vehicle in a reckless manner (RCW 46.61.522)

Willful
Failure to Return from Furlough (RCW 72.66.060)

IIIAbandonment
of dependent person 2 (RCW 9A.42.070)

Assault
3 (RCW 9A.36.031)

Assault
of a Child 3 (RCW 9A.36.140)

Bail
Jumping with class B or C Felony (RCW 9A.76.170(3)(c))

Burglary
2 (RCW 9A.52.030)

Communication
with a Minor for Immoral Purposes (RCW 9.68A.090)

Criminal
Gang Intimidation (RCW 9A.46.120)

Criminal
Mistreatment 2 (RCW 9A.42.030)

Custodial
Assault (RCW 9A.36.100)

Delivery
of a material in lieu of a controlled substance (RCW 69.50.401(c))

Escape
2 (RCW 9A.76.120)

Extortion
2 (RCW 9A.56.130)

Harassment
(RCW 9A.46.020)

Intimidating
a Public Servant (RCW 9A.76.180)

Introducing
Contraband 2 (RCW 9A.76.150)

Maintaining
a Dwelling or Place for Controlled Substances (RCW 69.50.402(a)(6))

Malicious
Injury to Railroad Property (RCW 81.60.070)

Manufacture,
deliver, or possess with intent to deliver marijuana (RCW 69.50.401(a)(1)(iii))

Manufacture,
distribute, or possess with intent to distribute an imitation controlled
substance (RCW 69.52.030(1))

Patronizing
a Juvenile Prostitute (RCW 9.68A.100)

Perjury
2 (RCW 9A.72.030)

Possession
of Incendiary Device (RCW 9.40.120)

Possession
of Machine Gun or Short-Barreled Shotgun or Rifle (RCW 9.41.190)

Promoting
Prostitution 2 (RCW 9A.88.080)

Recklessly
Trafficking in Stolen Property (RCW 9A.82.050(1))

Securities
Act violation (RCW 21.20.400)

Tampering
with a Witness (RCW 9A.72.120)

Telephone
Harassment (subsequent conviction or threat of death) (RCW 9.61.230)

Theft
of Livestock 2 (RCW 9A.56.080)

Unlawful
Imprisonment (RCW 9A.40.040)

Unlawful
possession of firearm in the second degree (RCW 9.41.040(1)(b))

Unlawful
Use of Building for Drug Purposes (RCW 69.53.010)

Vehicular
Assault, by the operation or driving of a vehicle with disregard for the safety
of others (RCW 46.61.522)

Willful
Failure to Return from Work Release (RCW 72.65.070)

IIComputer
Trespass 1 (RCW 9A.52.110)

Counterfeiting
(RCW 9.16.035(3))

Create,
deliver, or possess a counterfeit controlled substance (RCW 69.50.401(b))

Escape
from Community Custody (RCW 72.09.310)

Health
Care False Claims (RCW 48.80.030)

Identity
Theft 2 (RCW 9.35.020(2)(b))

Improperly
Obtaining Financial Information (RCW 9.35.010)

Malicious
Mischief 1 (RCW 9A.48.070)

Possession
of controlled substance that is either heroin or narcotics from Schedule I or
II or flunitrazepam from Schedule IV (RCW 69.50.401(d))

Possession
of phencyclidine (PCP) (RCW 69.50.401(d))

Possession
of Stolen Property 1 (RCW 9A.56.150)

Theft
1 (RCW 9A.56.030)

Theft
of Rental, Leased, or Lease-purchased Property (valued at one thousand five
hundred dollars or more) (RCW 9A.56.096(4))

Trafficking
in Insurance Claims (RCW 48.30A.015)

Unlawful
Practice of Law (RCW 2.48.180)

Unlicensed
Practice of a Profession or Business (RCW 18.130.190(7))

IAttempting
to Elude a Pursuing Police Vehicle (RCW 46.61.024)

False
Verification for Welfare (RCW 74.08.055)

Forged
Prescription (RCW 69.41.020)

Forged
Prescription for a Controlled Substance (RCW 69.50.403)

Forgery
(RCW 9A.60.020)

Malicious
Mischief 2 (RCW 9A.48.080)

Possess
Controlled Substance that is a Narcotic from Schedule III, IV, or V or
Non-narcotic from Schedule I-V (except phencyclidine or flunitrazepam) (RCW
69.50.401(d))

Possession
of Stolen Property 2 (RCW 9A.56.160)

Reckless
Burning 1 (RCW 9A.48.040)

Taking
Motor Vehicle Without Permission (RCW 9A.56.070)

Theft
2 (RCW 9A.56.040)

Theft
of Rental, Leased, or Lease-purchased Property (valued at two hundred fifty
dollars or more but less than one thousand five hundred dollars) (RCW 9A.56.096(4))

Unlawful
Issuance of Checks or Drafts (RCW 9A.56.060)

Unlawful
Use of Food Stamps (RCW 9.91.140 (2) and (3))

Vehicle
Prowl 1 (RCW 9A.52.095)

Sec. 4. RCW 9.94A.525 and 2001 c
264 s 5 are each amended to read as follows:

The offender score is
measured on the horizontal axis of the sentencing grid. The offender score
rules are as follows:

The offender score is
the sum of points accrued under this section rounded down to the nearest whole
number.

(1) A prior conviction
is a conviction which exists before the date of sentencing for the offense for
which the offender score is being computed. Convictions entered or sentenced
on the same date as the conviction for which the offender score is being
computed shall be deemed "other current offenses" within the meaning
of RCW 9.94A.589.

(2)(a) Prior class
A and sex ((prior)) felony convictions shall always be included in the
offender score.

(b) Prior class B
((prior)) felony convictions other than sex offenses shall not be
included in the offender score, if since the last date of release from
confinement (including full-time residential treatment) pursuant to a felony
conviction, if any, or entry of judgment and sentence, the offender had spent
ten consecutive years in the community without committing any crime that
subsequently results in a conviction.

(c) Prior class
C ((prior)) felony convictions other than sex offenses and other than
felony traffic offenses under RCW 46.61.502(6) and 46.61.504(6) shall not
be included in the offender score if, since the last date of release from
confinement (including full-time residential treatment) pursuant to a felony
conviction, if any, or entry of judgment and sentence, the offender had spent
five consecutive years in the community without committing any crime that
subsequently results in a conviction.

(d) Prior class C
felony traffic convictions under RCW 46.61.502(6) and 46.61.504(6) and prior serious
traffic convictions shall not be included in the offender score if((,)):
(i) Since the last date of release from confinement (including full-time
residential treatment) pursuant to a felony conviction, if any, or entry of
judgment and sentence, the offender spent five years in the community without
committing any crime that subsequently results in a conviction; and (ii) if
the present conviction is a felony traffic offense under RCW 46.61.502(6) and
46.61.504(6), the prior traffic or serious traffic conviction is no longer a
prior offense "within seven years" for purposes of RCW 46.61.5055.
This subsection applies to both adult and juvenile prior convictions.

(3) Out-of-state
convictions for offenses shall be classified according to the comparable
offense definitions and sentences provided by Washington law. Federal
convictions for offenses shall be classified according to the comparable
offense definitions and sentences provided by Washington law. If there is no
clearly comparable offense under Washington law or the offense is one that is
usually considered subject to exclusive federal jurisdiction, the offense shall
be scored as a class C felony equivalent if it was a felony under the relevant
federal statute.

(4) Score prior
convictions for felony anticipatory offenses (attempts, criminal solicitations,
and criminal conspiracies) the same as if they were convictions for completed
offenses.

(5)(a) In the case of
multiple prior convictions, for the purpose of computing the offender score,
count all convictions separately, except:

(i) Prior offenses
which were found, under RCW 9.94A.589(1)(a), to encompass the same criminal
conduct, shall be counted as one offense, the offense that yields the highest
offender score. The current sentencing court shall determine with respect to
other prior adult offenses for which sentences were served concurrently or
prior juvenile offenses for which sentences were served consecutively, whether
those offenses shall be counted as one offense or as separate offenses using
the "same criminal conduct" analysis found in RCW 9.94A.589(1)(a),
and if the court finds that they shall be counted as one offense, then the
offense that yields the highest offender score shall be used. The current
sentencing court may presume that such other prior offenses were not the same
criminal conduct from sentences imposed on separate dates, or in separate
counties or jurisdictions, or in separate complaints, indictments, or
informations;

(ii) In the case of
multiple prior convictions for offenses committed before July 1, 1986, for the
purpose of computing the offender score, count all adult convictions served
concurrently as one offense, and count all juvenile convictions entered on the
same date as one offense. Use the conviction for the offense that yields the
highest offender score.

(b) As used in this
subsection (5), "served concurrently" means that: (i) The latter
sentence was imposed with specific reference to the former; (ii) the concurrent
relationship of the sentences was judicially imposed; and (iii) the concurrent
timing of the sentences was not the result of a probation or parole revocation
on the former offense.

(6) If the present
conviction is one of the anticipatory offenses of criminal attempt,
solicitation, or conspiracy, count each prior conviction as if the present
conviction were for a completed offense. When these convictions are used as
criminal history, score them the same as a completed crime.

(7) If the present
conviction is for a nonviolent offense and not covered by subsection (11) or
(12) of this section, count one point for each adult prior felony conviction
and one point for each juvenile prior violent felony conviction and 1/2 point
for each juvenile prior nonviolent felony conviction.

(8) If the present
conviction is for a violent offense and not covered in subsection (9), (10),
(11), or (12) of this section, count two points for each prior adult and
juvenile violent felony conviction, one point for each prior adult nonviolent
felony conviction, and 1/2 point for each prior juvenile nonviolent felony
conviction.

(9) If the present
conviction is for a serious violent offense, count three points for prior adult
and juvenile convictions for crimes in this category, two points for each prior
adult and juvenile violent conviction (not already counted), one point for each
prior adult nonviolent felony conviction, and 1/2 point for each prior juvenile
nonviolent felony conviction.

(10) If the present
conviction is for Burglary 1, count prior convictions as in subsection (8) of
this section; however count two points for each prior adult Burglary 2 or
residential burglary conviction, and one point for each prior juvenile Burglary
2 or residential burglary conviction.

(11) If the present
conviction is for a felony traffic offense count two points for each adult or
juvenile prior conviction for Vehicular Homicide or Vehicular Assault; for each
felony offense count one point for each adult and 1/2 point for each juvenile
prior conviction; for each serious traffic offense, other than those used for
an enhancement pursuant to RCW 46.61.520(2), count one point for each adult and
1/2 point for each juvenile prior conviction.

(12) If the present
conviction is for a drug offense count three points for each adult prior felony
drug offense conviction and two points for each juvenile drug offense. All
other adult and juvenile felonies are scored as in subsection (8) of this
section if the current drug offense is violent, or as in subsection (7) of this
section if the current drug offense is nonviolent.

(13) If the present
conviction is for Escape from Community Custody, RCW 72.09.310, count only
prior escape convictions in the offender score. Count adult prior escape
convictions as one point and juvenile prior escape convictions as 1/2 point.

(14) If the present
conviction is for Escape 1, RCW 9A.76.110, or Escape 2, RCW 9A.76.120, count
adult prior convictions as one point and juvenile prior convictions as 1/2
point.

(15) If the present
conviction is for Burglary 2 or residential burglary, count priors as in
subsection (7) of this section; however, count two points for each adult and
juvenile prior Burglary 1 conviction, two points for each adult prior Burglary
2 or residential burglary conviction, and one point for each juvenile prior
Burglary 2 or residential burglary conviction.

(16) If the present
conviction is for a sex offense, count priors as in subsections (7) through
(15) of this section; however count three points for each adult and juvenile
prior sex offense conviction.

(17) If the present
conviction is for an offense committed while the offender was under community
placement, add one point.

Sec. 5. RCW 9.94A.650 and 2000 c
28 s 18 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) This section applies
to offenders who have never been previously convicted of a felony in this
state, federal court, or another state, and who have never participated in a
program of deferred prosecution for a felony, and who are convicted of a felony
that is not:

(a) Classified as a
violent offense or a sex offense under this chapter;

(b) Manufacture,
delivery, or possession with intent to manufacture or deliver a controlled
substance classified in Schedule I or II that is a narcotic drug or
flunitrazepam classified in Schedule IV;

(c) Manufacture,
delivery, or possession with intent to deliver a methamphetamine, its salts,
isomers, and salts of its isomers as defined in RCW 69.50.206(d)(2); ((or))

(d) The selling for
profit of any controlled substance or counterfeit substance classified in
Schedule I, RCW 69.50.204, except leaves and flowering tops of marihuana; or

(e) Driving while
under the influence of intoxicating liquor or any drug or physical control of a
vehicle while under the influence of intoxicating liquor or any drug.

(2) In sentencing a
first-time offender the court may waive the imposition of a sentence within the
standard sentence range and impose a sentence which may include up to ninety
days of confinement in a facility operated or utilized under contract by the
county and a requirement that the offender refrain from committing new
offenses. The sentence may also include a term of community supervision or
community custody as specified in subsection (3) of this section, which, in
addition to crime-related prohibitions, may include requirements that the
offender perform any one or more of the following:

(a) Devote time to a
specific employment or occupation;

(b) Undergo available
outpatient treatment for up to the period specified in subsection (3) of this
section, or inpatient treatment not to exceed the standard range of confinement
for that offense;

(c) Pursue a
prescribed, secular course of study or vocational training;

(d) Remain within
prescribed geographical boundaries and notify the community corrections officer
prior to any change in the offender's address or employment;

(e) Report as directed
to a community corrections officer; or

(f) Pay all
court-ordered legal financial obligations as provided in RCW 9.94A.030 and/or
perform community service work.

(3) The terms and
statuses applicable to sentences under subsection (2) of this section are:

(a) For sentences
imposed on or after July 25, 1999, for crimes committed before July 1, 2000, up
to one year of community supervision. If treatment is ordered, the period of
community supervision may include up to the period of treatment, but shall not
exceed two years; and

(b) For crimes
committed on or after July 1, 2000, up to one year of community custody unless
treatment is ordered, in which case the period of community custody may include
up to the period of treatment, but shall not exceed two years. Any term of
community custody imposed under this section is subject to conditions and
sanctions as authorized in this section and in RCW 9.94A.715 (2) and (3).

(4) The department
shall discharge from community supervision any offender sentenced under this
section before July 25, 1999, who has served at least one year of community
supervision and has completed any treatment ordered by the court.

Sec. 6. RCW 46.61.502 and 1998 c
213 s 3 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) A person is guilty
of driving while under the influence of intoxicating liquor or any drug if the
person drives a vehicle within this state:

(a) And the person has,
within two hours after driving, an alcohol concentration of 0.08 or higher as
shown by analysis of the person's breath or blood made under RCW 46.61.506; or

(b) While the person is
under the influence of or affected by intoxicating liquor or any drug; or

(c) While the person is
under the combined influence of or affected by intoxicating liquor and any
drug.

(2) The fact that a
person charged with a violation of this section is or has been entitled to use
a drug under the laws of this state shall not constitute a defense against a
charge of violating this section.

(3) It is an
affirmative defense to a violation of subsection (1)(a) of this section which
the defendant must prove by a preponderance of the evidence that the defendant
consumed a sufficient quantity of alcohol after the time of driving and before
the administration of an analysis of the person's breath or blood to cause the
defendant's alcohol concentration to be 0.08 or more within two hours after driving.
The court shall not admit evidence of this defense unless the defendant
notifies the prosecution prior to the omnibus or pretrial hearing in the case
of the defendant's intent to assert the affirmative defense.

(4) Analyses of blood
or breath samples obtained more than two hours after the alleged driving may be
used as evidence that within two hours of the alleged driving, a person had an
alcohol concentration of 0.08 or more in violation of subsection (1)(a) of this
section, and in any case in which the analysis shows an alcohol concentration
above 0.00 may be used as evidence that a person was under the influence of or
affected by intoxicating liquor or any drug in violation of subsection (1)(b)
or (c) of this section.

(5) Except as
provided in subsection (6) of this section, a violation of this section is
a gross misdemeanor.

(6) A violation of
this section by a person who has two or more prior offenses within seven years
is punishable as a class C felony according to chapter 9A.20 RCW. For the purposes
of this subsection, the definitions of "prior offense" and
"within seven years" contained in RCW 46.61.5055 apply.

Sec. 7. RCW 46.61.504 and 1998 c
213 s 5 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) A person is guilty
of being in actual physical control of a motor vehicle while under the
influence of intoxicating liquor or any drug if the person has actual physical
control of a vehicle within this state:

(a) And the person has,
within two hours after being in actual physical control of the vehicle, an
alcohol concentration of 0.08 or higher as shown by analysis of the person's
breath or blood made under RCW 46.61.506; or

(b) While the person is
under the influence of or affected by intoxicating liquor or any drug; or

(c) While the person is
under the combined influence of or affected by intoxicating liquor and any
drug.

(2) The fact that a
person charged with a violation of this section is or has been entitled to use
a drug under the laws of this state does not constitute a defense against any
charge of violating this section. No person may be convicted under this
section if, prior to being pursued by a law enforcement officer, the person has
moved the vehicle safely off the roadway.

(3) It is an
affirmative defense to a violation of subsection (1)(a) of this section which
the defendant must prove by a preponderance of the evidence that the defendant
consumed a sufficient quantity of alcohol after the time of being in actual
physical control of the vehicle and before the administration of an analysis of
the person's breath or blood to cause the defendant's alcohol concentration to
be 0.08 or more within two hours after being in such control. The court shall
not admit evidence of this defense unless the defendant notifies the
prosecution prior to the omnibus or pretrial hearing in the case of the
defendant's intent to assert the affirmative defense.

(4) Analyses of blood
or breath samples obtained more than two hours after the alleged being in actual
physical control of a vehicle may be used as evidence that within two hours of
the alleged being in such control, a person had an alcohol concentration of
0.08 or more in violation of subsection (1)(a) of this section, and in any case
in which the analysis shows an alcohol concentration above 0.00 may be used as
evidence that a person was under the influence of or affected by intoxicating
liquor or any drug in violation of subsection (1)(b) or (c) of this section.

(5) Except as
provided in subsection (6) of this section, a violation of this section is
a gross misdemeanor.

(6) A violation of
this section by a person who has two or more prior offenses within seven years
is punishable as a class C felony according to chapter 9A.20 RCW. For the
purposes of this subsection, the definitions of "prior offense" and
"within seven years" contained in RCW 46.61.5055 apply.

Sec. 8. RCW 46.61.5055 and 1999
c 324 s 5, 1999 c 274 s 6, and 1999 c 5 s 1 are each reenacted and amended to read
as follows:

(1) A person who is
convicted of a violation of RCW 46.61.502 or 46.61.504 and who has no prior
offense within seven years shall be punished as follows:

(a) In the case of a
person whose alcohol concentration was less than 0.15, or for whom for reasons
other than the person's refusal to take a test offered pursuant to RCW
46.20.308 there is no test result indicating the person's alcohol
concentration:

(i) By imprisonment for
not less than one day nor more than one year. Twenty-four consecutive hours of
the imprisonment may not be suspended or deferred unless the court finds that
the imposition of this mandatory minimum sentence would impose a substantial
risk to the offender's physical or mental well-being. Whenever the mandatory
minimum sentence is suspended or deferred, the court shall state in writing the
reason for granting the suspension or deferral and the facts upon which the
suspension or deferral is based. In lieu of the mandatory minimum term of
imprisonment required under this subsection (1)(a)(i), the court may order not
less than fifteen days of electronic home monitoring. The offender shall pay
the cost of electronic home monitoring. The county or municipality in which
the penalty is being imposed shall determine the cost. The court may also
require the offender's electronic home monitoring device to include an alcohol
detection breathalyzer, and the court may restrict the amount of alcohol the
offender may consume during the time the offender is on electronic home monitoring;
and

(ii) By a fine of not
less than three hundred fifty dollars nor more than five thousand dollars.
Three hundred fifty dollars of the fine may not be suspended or deferred unless
the court finds the offender to be indigent; or

(b) In the case of a
person whose alcohol concentration was at least 0.15, or for whom by reason of
the person's refusal to take a test offered pursuant to RCW 46.20.308 there is
no test result indicating the person's alcohol concentration:

(i) By imprisonment for
not less than two days nor more than one year. Two consecutive days of the
imprisonment may not be suspended or deferred unless the court finds that the
imposition of this mandatory minimum sentence would impose a substantial risk
to the offender's physical or mental well-being. Whenever the mandatory
minimum sentence is suspended or deferred, the court shall state in writing the
reason for granting the suspension or deferral and the facts upon which the
suspension or deferral is based. In lieu of the mandatory minimum term of
imprisonment required under this subsection (1)(b)(i), the court may order not
less than thirty days of electronic home monitoring. The offender shall pay
the cost of electronic home monitoring. The county or municipality in which
the penalty is being imposed shall determine the cost. The court may also
require the offender's electronic home monitoring device to include an alcohol
detection breathalyzer, and the court may restrict the amount of alcohol the
offender may consume during the time the offender is on electronic home
monitoring; and

(ii) By a fine of not
less than five hundred dollars nor more than five thousand dollars. Five
hundred dollars of the fine may not be suspended or deferred unless the court
finds the offender to be indigent; and

(iii) By a
court-ordered restriction under RCW 46.20.720.

(2) A person who is
convicted of a violation of RCW 46.61.502 or 46.61.504 and who has one prior
offense within seven years shall be punished as follows:

(a) In the case of a
person whose alcohol concentration was less than 0.15, or for whom for reasons
other than the person's refusal to take a test offered pursuant to RCW
46.20.308 there is no test result indicating the person's alcohol
concentration:

(i) By imprisonment for
not less than thirty days nor more than one year and sixty days of electronic
home monitoring. The offender shall pay for the cost of the electronic
monitoring. The county or municipality where the penalty is being imposed
shall determine the cost. The court may also require the offender's electronic
home monitoring device include an alcohol detection breathalyzer, and may
restrict the amount of alcohol the offender may consume during the time the
offender is on electronic home monitoring. Thirty days of imprisonment and
sixty days of electronic home monitoring may not be suspended or deferred
unless the court finds that the imposition of this mandatory minimum sentence
would impose a substantial risk to the offender's physical or mental
well-being. Whenever the mandatory minimum sentence is suspended or deferred, the
court shall state in writing the reason for granting the suspension or deferral
and the facts upon which the suspension or deferral is based; and

(ii) By a fine of not
less than five hundred dollars nor more than five thousand dollars. Five
hundred dollars of the fine may not be suspended or deferred unless the court
finds the offender to be indigent; and

(iii) By a
court-ordered restriction under RCW 46.20.720; or

(b) In the case of a
person whose alcohol concentration was at least 0.15, or for whom by reason of
the person's refusal to take a test offered pursuant to RCW 46.20.308 there is
no test result indicating the person's alcohol concentration:

(i) By imprisonment for
not less than forty-five days nor more than one year and ninety days of electronic
home monitoring. The offender shall pay for the cost of the electronic
monitoring. The county or municipality where the penalty is being imposed
shall determine the cost. The court may also require the offender's electronic
home monitoring device include an alcohol detection breathalyzer, and may
restrict the amount of alcohol the offender may consume during the time the
offender is on electronic home monitoring. Forty-five days of imprisonment and
ninety days of electronic home monitoring may not be suspended or deferred
unless the court finds that the imposition of this mandatory minimum sentence
would impose a substantial risk to the offender's physical or mental
well-being. Whenever the mandatory minimum sentence is suspended or deferred, the
court shall state in writing the reason for granting the suspension or deferral
and the facts upon which the suspension or deferral is based; and

(ii) By a fine of not
less than seven hundred fifty dollars nor more than five thousand dollars.
Seven hundred fifty dollars of the fine may not be suspended or deferred unless
the court finds the offender to be indigent; and

(iii) By a
court-ordered restriction under RCW 46.20.720.

(3) A person who is
convicted of a violation of RCW 46.61.502 or 46.61.504 and who has two or more
prior offenses within seven years shall be punished ((as follows:

(a) In the case of a
person whose alcohol concentration was less than 0.15, or for whom for reasons
other than the person's refusal to take a test offered pursuant to RCW
46.20.308 there is no test result indicating the person's alcohol
concentration:

(i) By imprisonment
for not less than ninety days nor more than one year and one hundred twenty
days of electronic home monitoring. The offender shall pay for the cost of the
electronic monitoring. The county or municipality where the penalty is being
imposed shall determine the cost. The court may also require the offender's
electronic home monitoring device include an alcohol detection breathalyzer,
and may restrict the amount of alcohol the offender may consume during the time
the offender is on electronic home monitoring. Ninety days of imprisonment and
one hundred twenty days of electronic home monitoring may not be suspended or
deferred unless the court finds that the imposition of this mandatory minimum
sentence would impose a substantial risk to the offender's physical or mental
well-being. Whenever the mandatory minimum sentence is suspended or deferred,
the court shall state in writing the reason for granting the suspension or
deferral and the facts upon which the suspension or deferral is based; and

(ii) By a fine of
not less than one thousand dollars nor more than five thousand dollars. One
thousand dollars of the fine may not be suspended or deferred unless the court
finds the offender to be indigent; and

(iii) By a
court-ordered restriction under RCW 46.20.720; or

(b) In the case of a
person whose alcohol concentration was at least 0.15, or for whom by reason of
the person's refusal to take a test offered pursuant to RCW 46.20.308 there is
no test result indicating the person's alcohol concentration:

(i) By imprisonment
for not less than one hundred twenty days nor more than one year and one
hundred fifty days of electronic home monitoring. The offender shall pay for
the cost of the electronic monitoring. The county or municipality where the
penalty is being imposed shall determine the cost. The court may also require
the offender's electronic home monitoring device include an alcohol detection
breathalyzer, and may restrict the amount of alcohol the offender may consume
during the time the offender is on electronic home monitoring. One hundred
twenty days of imprisonment and one hundred fifty days of electronic home
monitoring may not be suspended or deferred unless the court finds that the
imposition of this mandatory minimum sentence would impose a substantial risk
to the offender's physical or mental well-being. Whenever the mandatory
minimum sentence is suspended or deferred, the court shall state in writing the
reason for granting the suspension or deferral and the facts upon which the
suspension or deferral is based; and

(ii) By a fine of
not less than one thousand five hundred dollars nor more than five thousand
dollars. One thousand five hundred dollars of the fine may not be suspended or
deferred unless the court finds the offender to be indigent; and

(iii) By a
court-ordered restriction under RCW 46.20.720)) in accordance with chapter 9.94A RCW. In addition, the court
shall impose the restrictions set forth in RCW 46.20.720.

(4) In exercising its
discretion in setting nonfelony penalties within the limits allowed by
this section, the court shall particularly consider the following:

(a) Whether the
person's driving at the time of the offense was responsible for injury or
damage to another or another's property; and

(b) Whether the person
was driving or in physical control of a vehicle with one or more passengers at
the time of the offense.

(5) An offender
punishable under this section is subject to the alcohol assessment and
treatment provisions of RCW 46.61.5056.

(6) The license,
permit, or nonresident privilege of a person convicted of driving or being in
physical control of a motor vehicle while under the influence of intoxicating
liquor or drugs must:

(a) If the person's
alcohol concentration was less than 0.15, or if for reasons other than the
person's refusal to take a test offered under RCW 46.20.308 there is no test
result indicating the person's alcohol concentration:

(i) Where there has
been no prior offense within seven years, be suspended or denied by the
department for ninety days;

(ii) Where there has
been one prior offense within seven years, be revoked or denied by the
department for two years; or

(iii) Where there have
been two or more prior offenses within seven years, be revoked or denied by the
department for three years;

(b) If the person's
alcohol concentration was at least 0.15, or if by reason of the person's
refusal to take a test offered under RCW 46.20.308 there is no test result
indicating the person's alcohol concentration:

(i) Where there has
been no prior offense within seven years, be revoked or denied by the
department for one year;

(ii) Where there has
been one prior offense within seven years, be revoked or denied by the
department for nine hundred days; or

(iii) Where there have
been two or more prior offenses within seven years, be revoked or denied by the
department for four years.

For purposes of this
subsection, the department shall refer to the driver's record maintained under
RCW 46.52.120 when determining the existence of prior offenses.

(7) After expiration of
any period of suspension, revocation, or denial of the offender's license,
permit, or privilege to drive required by this section, the department shall
place the offender's driving privilege in probationary status pursuant to RCW
46.20.355.

(8)(a) In addition to
any nonsuspendable and nondeferrable jail sentence required by this section,
whenever the court imposes less than one year in jail, the court shall also
suspend but shall not defer a period of confinement for a period not exceeding
five years. The court shall impose conditions of probation that include: (i)
Not driving a motor vehicle within this state without a valid license to drive
and proof of financial responsibility for the future; (ii) not driving a motor
vehicle within this state while having an alcohol concentration of 0.08 or more
within two hours after driving; and (iii) not refusing to submit to a test of his
or her breath or blood to determine alcohol concentration upon request of a law
enforcement officer who has reasonable grounds to believe the person was
driving or was in actual physical control of a motor vehicle within this state
while under the influence of intoxicating liquor. The court may impose
conditions of probation that include nonrepetition, installation of an ignition
interlock or other biological or technical device on the probationer's motor
vehicle, alcohol or drug treatment, supervised probation, or other conditions
that may be appropriate. The sentence may be imposed in whole or in part upon
violation of a condition of probation during the suspension period.

(b) For each violation
of mandatory conditions of probation under (a)(i) and (ii) or (a)(i) and (iii)
of this subsection, the court shall order the convicted person to be confined
for thirty days, which shall not be suspended or deferred.

(c) For each incident
involving a violation of a mandatory condition of probation imposed under this
subsection, the license, permit, or privilege to drive of the person shall be
suspended by the court for thirty days or, if such license, permit, or
privilege to drive already is suspended, revoked, or denied at the time the
finding of probation violation is made, the suspension, revocation, or denial
then in effect shall be extended by thirty days. The court shall notify the
department of any suspension, revocation, or denial or any extension of a
suspension, revocation, or denial imposed under this subsection.

(9) A court may waive
the electronic home monitoring requirements of this chapter when:

(a) The offender does
not have a dwelling, telephone service, or any other necessity to operate an
electronic home monitoring system;

(b) The offender does
not reside in the state of Washington; or

(c) The court
determines that there is reason to believe that the offender would violate the
conditions of the electronic home monitoring penalty.

Whenever the mandatory
minimum term of electronic home monitoring is waived, the court shall state in
writing the reason for granting the waiver and the facts upon which the waiver
is based, and shall impose an alternative sentence with similar punitive
consequences. The alternative sentence may include, but is not limited to,
additional jail time, work crew, or work camp.

Whenever the
combination of jail time and electronic home monitoring or alternative sentence
would exceed three hundred sixty-five days, the offender shall serve the jail
portion of the sentence first, and the electronic home monitoring or
alternative portion of the sentence shall be reduced so that the combination
does not exceed three hundred sixty-five days.

(10) An offender
serving a sentence under this section, whether or not a mandatory minimum term
has expired, may be granted an extraordinary medical placement by the jail
administrator subject to the standards and limitations set forth in RCW
9.94A.728(4).

(11) For purposes of
this section:

(a) A "prior
offense" means any of the following:

(i) A conviction for a
violation of RCW 46.61.502 or an equivalent local ordinance;

(ii) A conviction for a
violation of RCW 46.61.504 or an equivalent local ordinance;

(iii) A conviction for
a violation of RCW 46.61.520 committed while under the influence of
intoxicating liquor or any drug;

(iv) A conviction for a
violation of RCW 46.61.522 committed while under the influence of intoxicating
liquor or any drug;

(v) A conviction for a
violation of RCW 46.61.5249, 46.61.500, or 9A.36.050 or an equivalent local
ordinance, if the conviction is the result of a charge that was originally
filed as a violation of RCW 46.61.502 or 46.61.504, or an equivalent local
ordinance, or of RCW 46.61.520 or 46.61.522;

(vi) An out-of-state
conviction for a violation that would have been a violation of (a)(i), (ii),
(iii), (iv), or (v) of this subsection if committed in this state;

(vii) A deferred
prosecution under chapter 10.05 RCW granted in a prosecution for a violation of
RCW 46.61.502, 46.61.504, or an equivalent local ordinance; or

(viii) A deferred
prosecution under chapter 10.05 RCW granted in a prosecution for a violation of
RCW 46.61.5249, or an equivalent local ordinance, if the charge under which the
deferred prosecution was granted was originally filed as a violation of RCW
46.61.502 or 46.61.504, or an equivalent local ordinance, or of RCW 46.61.520
or 46.61.522; and

(b)
"Within seven years" means that the arrest for a prior offense
occurred within seven years of the arrest for the current offense.

Sec. 9. RCW 46.61.5151 and 1995
c 332 s 15 are each amended to read as follows:

A
sentencing court may allow ((persons convicted of violating)) a
person who is convicted of a nonfelony violation of RCW 46.61.502 or
46.61.504 to fulfill the terms of the sentence provided in RCW 46.61.5055 in
nonconsecutive or intermittent time periods. However, a term of confinement
of more than one year shall be served consecutively and any mandatory
minimum sentence under RCW 46.61.5055 shall be served consecutively unless
suspended or deferred as otherwise provided by law.

---
END ---