BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF
WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec.
1. A new section is added
to chapter 48.20 RCW to read as follows:

A participating
provider, as defined under RCW 48.44.010, may not request a patient to pay more
than the copay or deductible specified by the health carrier, as defined under
RCW 48.43.005, until such time as the carrier notifies the provider and patient
in writing that no further payment will be made.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
2. A new section is added
to chapter 48.21 RCW to read as follows:

A participating
provider, as defined under RCW 48.44.010, may not request a patient to pay more
than the copay or deductible specified by the health carrier, as defined under
RCW 48.43.005, until such time as the carrier notifies the provider and patient
in writing that no further payment will be made.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
3. A new section is added
to chapter 48.44 RCW to read as follows:

A participating
provider may not request a patient to pay more than the copay or deductible
specified by the health carrier, until such time as the carrier notifies the
provider and patient in writing that no further payment will be made.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
4. A new section is added
to chapter 48.46 RCW to read as follows:

A
participating provider may not request a patient to pay more than the copay or
deductible specified by the health carrier, until such time as the carrier notifies
the provider and patient in writing that no further payment will be made.

---
END ---