BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF
WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1. RCW 74.20.065 and 1983
1st ex.s. c 41 s 31 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) The department
is authorized to excuse the legal custodian from support payments if a
superior court or tribal court has made a finding that:

(a) The legal
custodian has been wrongfully deprived of physical custody((, the department
is authorized to excuse the custodian from support payments for a child or
children receiving or on whose behalf public assistance was provided under
chapter 74.12 RCW)). A legal custodian is wrongfully deprived of
physical custody if:

(i) The child is
taken or enticed from the legal custodian's physical custody. Proof of
enticement may include establishing that the child is allowed to live without
reasonably appropriate supervision and restriction;

(ii) The legal
custodian has not subsequently assented to the deprivation; and

(iii) The legal
custodian has made reasonable efforts to regain physical custody; or

(b) It is not in the
best interest of the child, as determined in subsection (2) of this section, to
be in the physical custody of the physical custodian, and the physical
custodian:

(i) Is not a
relative of the child;

(ii) Is not licensed
under RCW 74.15.030 to care for children;

(iii) Does not have
legal custody of the child; or

(iv) Is not a person
the child has been placed with under a court order.

(2) A judge may
consider the following factors when making a determination of the child's best
interest:

(a) The strength of
the relationship between the child and the physical custodian;

(b) The relationship
between each of the child's parents and the physical custodian;

(c) The nature and
reason for either parent's objection to the physical custodian retaining
custody;

(d) Any criminal
history or history of physical, emotional, or sexual abuse or neglect by the
physical custodian; and

(e) Any
other factor relevant to the child's best interest.

--- END ---