BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF
WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1. RCW 70.05.060 and 1991 c
3 s 308 are each amended to read as follows:

Each local board of
health shall have supervision over all matters pertaining to the preservation
of the life and health of the people within its jurisdiction and shall:

(1) Enforce through the
local health officer or the administrative officer appointed under RCW
70.05.040, if any, the public health statutes of the state and rules
promulgated by the state board of health and the secretary of health;

(2) Supervise the
maintenance of all health and sanitary measures for the protection of the
public health within its jurisdiction;

(3) Enact such local
rules and regulations as are necessary in order to preserve, promote and
improve the public health and provide for the enforcement thereof,
including, but not limited to, assessing a civil penalty for violation of a
public health statute, rule, or regulation relating to environmental health,
not to exceed one hundred dollars per day;

(4) Provide for the
control and prevention of any dangerous, contagious or infectious disease
within the jurisdiction of the local health department;

(5) Provide for the
prevention, control and abatement of nuisances detrimental to the public
health;

(6) Make such reports
to the state board of health through the local health officer or the
administrative officer as the state board of health may require; and

(7)
Establish fee schedules for issuing or renewing licenses or permits or for such
other services as are authorized by the law and the rules of the state board of
health: PROVIDED, That such fees for services shall not exceed the actual cost
of providing any such services.

--- END ---