BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF
WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1. RCW 36.70A.070 and 1998
c 171 s 2 are each amended to read as follows:

The comprehensive plan
of a county or city that is required or chooses to plan under RCW 36.70A.040
shall consist of a map or maps, and descriptive text covering objectives,
principles, and standards used to develop the comprehensive plan. The plan
shall be an internally consistent document and all elements shall be consistent
with the future land use map. A comprehensive plan shall be adopted and
amended with public participation as provided in RCW 36.70A.140.

Each comprehensive plan
shall include a plan, scheme, or design for each of the following:

(1) A land use element
designating the proposed general distribution and general location and extent
of the uses of land, where appropriate, for agriculture, timber production,
housing, commerce, industry, recreation, open spaces, general aviation
airports, public utilities, public facilities, and other land uses. The land
use element shall include population densities, building intensities, and
estimates of future population growth. The land use element shall provide for
protection of the quality and quantity of ground water used for public water
supplies. Where applicable, the land use element shall review drainage,
flooding, and storm water run-off in the area and nearby jurisdictions and
provide guidance for corrective actions to mitigate or cleanse those discharges
that pollute waters of the state, including Puget Sound or waters entering
Puget Sound.

(2) A housing element
ensuring the vitality and character of established residential neighborhoods
that: (a) Includes an inventory and analysis of existing and projected housing
needs; (b) includes a statement of goals, policies, objectives, and mandatory
provisions for the preservation, improvement, and development of housing,
including single-family residences; (c) identifies sufficient land for housing,
including, but not limited to, government-assisted housing, housing for
low-income families, manufactured housing, multifamily housing, and group homes
and foster care facilities; and (d) makes adequate provisions for existing and
projected needs of all economic segments of the community.

(3) A capital
facilities plan element consisting of: (a) An inventory of existing capital
facilities owned by public entities, showing the locations and capacities of the
capital facilities; (b) a forecast of the future needs for such capital
facilities; (c) the proposed locations and capacities of expanded or new
capital facilities; (d) at least a six-year plan that will finance such capital
facilities within projected funding capacities and clearly identifies sources
of public money for such purposes; and (e) a requirement to reassess the land
use element if probable funding falls short of meeting existing needs and to
ensure that the land use element, capital facilities plan element, and
financing plan within the capital facilities plan element are coordinated and
consistent.

(4) A utilities element
consisting of the general location, proposed location, and capacity of all
existing and proposed utilities, including, but not limited to, electrical
lines, telecommunication lines, and natural gas lines.

(5) Rural element.
Counties shall include a rural element including lands that are not designated
for urban growth, agriculture, forest, or mineral resources. The following
provisions shall apply to the rural element:

(a) Growth management
act goals and local circumstances. Because circumstances vary from county to
county, in establishing patterns of rural densities and uses, a county may
consider local circumstances, but shall develop a written record explaining how
the rural element harmonizes the planning goals in RCW 36.70A.020 and meets the
requirements of this chapter.

(b) Rural development.
The rural element shall permit rural development, forestry, and agriculture in
rural areas. The rural element shall provide for a variety of rural densities,
uses, essential public facilities, and rural governmental services needed to
serve the permitted densities and uses. In order to achieve a variety of rural
densities and uses, counties may provide for clustering, density transfer,
design guidelines, conservation easements, and other innovative techniques that
will accommodate appropriate rural densities and uses that are not
characterized by urban growth and that are consistent with rural character.

(c) Measures governing
rural development. The rural element shall include measures that apply to
rural development and protect the rural character of the area, as established
by the county, by:

(i) Containing or
otherwise controlling rural development;

(ii) Assuring visual
compatibility of rural development with the surrounding rural area;

(iii) Reducing the
inappropriate conversion of undeveloped land into sprawling, low-density
development in the rural area;

(iv) Protecting
critical areas, as provided in RCW 36.70A.060, and surface water and ground
water resources; and

(v) Protecting against
conflicts with the use of agricultural, forest, and mineral resource lands
designated under RCW 36.70A.170.

(d) Limited areas of
more intensive rural development. Subject to the requirements of this
subsection and except as otherwise specifically provided in this subsection
(5)(d), the rural element may allow for limited areas of more intensive rural
development, including necessary public facilities and public services to serve
the limited area as follows:

(i) Rural development
consisting of the infill, development, or redevelopment of existing commercial,
industrial, residential, or mixed-use areas, whether characterized as shoreline
development, villages, hamlets, rural activity centers, or crossroads
developments. A commercial, industrial, residential, shoreline, or mixed-use
area shall be subject to the requirements of (d)(iv) of this subsection, but
shall not be subject to the requirements of (c)(ii) and (iii) of this
subsection. An industrial area is not required to be principally designed to
serve the existing and projected rural population;

(ii) The
intensification of development on lots containing, or new development of,
small-scale recreational or tourist uses, including commercial facilities to
serve those recreational or tourist uses, that rely on a rural location and
setting, but that do not include new residential development. A small-scale
recreation or tourist use is not required to be principally designed to serve
the existing and projected rural population. Public services and public
facilities shall be limited to those necessary to serve the recreation or
tourist use and shall be provided in a manner that does not permit low-density
sprawl;

(iii) The
intensification of development on lots containing isolated nonresidential uses
or new development of isolated cottage industries and isolated small-scale
businesses that are not principally designed to serve the existing and
projected rural population and nonresidential uses, but do provide job
opportunities for rural residents. Public services and public facilities shall
be limited to those necessary to serve the isolated nonresidential use and
shall be provided in a manner that does not permit low-density sprawl;

(iv) A county shall
adopt measures to minimize and contain the existing areas or uses of more
intensive rural development, as appropriate, authorized under this subsection.
Lands included in such existing areas or uses shall not extend beyond the
logical outer boundary of the existing area or use, thereby allowing a new
pattern of low-density sprawl. Existing areas are those that are clearly
identifiable and contained and where there is a logical boundary delineated
predominately by the built environment, but that may also include undeveloped
lands if limited as provided in this subsection. The county shall establish
the logical outer boundary of an area of more intensive rural development. In
establishing the logical outer boundary the county shall address (A) the need
to preserve the character of existing natural neighborhoods and communities,
(B) physical boundaries such as bodies of water, streets and highways, and land
forms and contours, (C) the prevention of abnormally irregular boundaries, and
(D) the ability to provide public facilities and public services in a manner
that does not permit low-density sprawl;

(v) For purposes of (d)
of this subsection, an existing area or existing use is one that was in
existence:

(A) On July 1, 1990, in
a county that was initially required to plan under all of the provisions of
this chapter;

(B) On the date the
county adopted a resolution under RCW 36.70A.040(2), in a county that is
planning under all of the provisions of this chapter under RCW 36.70A.040(2);
or

(C) On the date the
office of financial management certifies the county's population as provided in
RCW 36.70A.040(5), in a county that is planning under all of the provisions of
this chapter pursuant to RCW 36.70A.040(5).

(e) Exception. This
subsection shall not be interpreted to permit in the rural area a major
industrial development or a master planned resort unless otherwise specifically
permitted under RCW 36.70A.360 and 36.70A.365.

(6) A transportation
element that implements, and is consistent with, the land use element.

(a) The transportation
element shall include the following subelements:

(i) Land use
assumptions used in estimating travel;

(ii) Estimated traffic
impacts to state-owned transportation facilities resulting from land use
assumptions to assist the department of transportation in monitoring the
performance of state facilities, to plan improvements for the facilities, and
to assess the impact of land-use decisions on state-owned transportation
facilities;

(iii) Facilities and
services needs, including:

(A) An inventory of
air, water, and ground transportation facilities and services, including
transit alignments and general aviation airport facilities, to define existing
capital facilities and travel levels as a basis for future planning. This
inventory must include state-owned transportation facilities within the city or
county's jurisdiction boundaries;

(B) Level of service
standards for all locally owned arterials and transit routes to serve as a
gauge to judge performance of the system. These standards should be regionally
coordinated;

(C) For state-owned
transportation facilities, level of service standards for highways, as
prescribed in chapters 47.06 and 47.80 RCW, to gauge the performance of the
system. The purposes of reflecting level of service standards for state
highways in the local comprehensive plan are to monitor the performance of the
system, to evaluate improvement strategies, and to facilitate coordination
between the county's or city's six-year street, road, or transit program and
the department of transportation's six-year investment program. The
concurrency requirements of (((b) of this subsection)) section 2(1)
of this act do not apply to transportation facilities and services of
statewide significance except for counties consisting of islands whose only
connection to the mainland are state highways or ferry routes. In these island
counties, state highways and ferry route capacity must be a factor in meeting
the concurrency requirements in (((b) of this subsection)) section 2
of this act;

(D) Specific actions
and requirements for bringing into compliance locally owned transportation
facilities or services that are below an established level of service standard;

(E) Forecasts of
traffic for at least ten years based on the adopted land use plan to provide
information on the location, timing, and capacity needs of future growth;

(F) Identification of
state and local system needs to meet current and future demands. Identified
needs on state-owned transportation facilities must be consistent with the
statewide multimodal transportation plan required under chapter 47.06 RCW;

(iv) Finance,
including:

(A) An analysis of
funding capability to judge needs against probable funding resources;

(B) A multiyear
financing plan based on the needs identified in the comprehensive plan, the
appropriate parts of which shall serve as the basis for the six-year street,
road, or transit program required by RCW 35.77.010 for cities, RCW 36.81.121
for counties, and RCW 35.58.2795 for public transportation systems. The
multiyear financing plan should be coordinated with the six-year improvement
program developed by the department of transportation as required by RCW
47.05.030;

(C) If probable funding
falls short of meeting identified needs, a discussion of how additional funding
will be raised, or how land use assumptions will be reassessed to ensure that
level of service standards will be met;

(v) Intergovernmental
coordination efforts, including an assessment of the impacts of the
transportation plan and land use assumptions on the transportation systems of
adjacent jurisdictions;

(vi) Demand-management
strategies.

(b) ((After adoption
of the comprehensive plan by jurisdictions required to plan or who choose to
plan under RCW 36.70A.040, local jurisdictions must adopt and enforce
ordinances which prohibit development approval if the development causes the
level of service on a locally owned transportation facility to decline below
the standards adopted in the transportation element of the comprehensive plan,
unless transportation improvements or strategies to accommodate the impacts of
development are made concurrent with the development. These strategies may include
increased public transportation service, ride sharing programs, demand
management, and other transportation systems management strategies. For the
purposes of this subsection (6) "concurrent with the development"
shall mean that improvements or strategies are in place at the time of
development, or that a financial commitment is in place to complete the
improvements or strategies within six years.

(c))) The transportation element described in this
subsection (6), and the six-year plans required by RCW 35.77.010 for cities,
RCW 36.81.121 for counties, RCW 35.58.2795 for public transportation systems,
and RCW 47.05.030 for the state, must be consistent.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
2. A new section is added
to chapter 36.70A RCW to read as follows:

(1) After adoption of
the comprehensive plan by jurisdictions required to plan or who choose to plan
under RCW 36.70A.040, local jurisdictions must adopt and enforce ordinances
which prohibit development approval if the development causes the level of
service on a locally owned transportation facility to decline below the
standards adopted in the transportation element of the comprehensive plan,
unless transportation improvements or strategies to accommodate the impacts of
development are made concurrent with the development. These strategies may
include increased public transportation service, ride‑sharing programs,
demand management, and other transportation systems management strategies.

(2) Jurisdictions
planning under RCW 36.70A.040 shall establish in their comprehensive plans
level of service standards for all parks and recreation services and facilities
within their jurisdictions. These standards should be coordinated with
relevant special purpose districts. After adoption of the comprehensive plan
by jurisdictions planning under RCW 36.70A.040, local jurisdictions must adopt
and enforce ordinances which prohibit development approval if the development
causes the level of service for any of these services or facilities to decline
below the standards adopted in the comprehensive plan, unless improvements or
strategies to accommodate the impacts of development are made concurrent with
the development.

(3) For the purposes of
this section, "concurrent with the development" means that
improvements or strategies are in place at the time of development, or that a
financial commitment is in place to complete the improvements or strategies
within six years.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 3. This act applies to all
comprehensive plans adopted by jurisdictions planning under RCW 36.70A.040 on
or after September 1, 2002.

---
END ---