BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF
WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1. RCW 15.58.050 and 1989 c
380 s 3 are each amended to read as follows:

Every pesticide which
is distributed within this state or delivered for transportation or transported
in intrastate commerce or between points within this state through any point
outside this state shall be registered with the director subject to the
provisions of this chapter. ((Such registration shall be renewed annually
prior to January 1: PROVIDED, That)) However, registration is not
required if: A pesticide is shipped from one plant or warehouse to
another plant or warehouse operated by the same person and used solely at such
plant or warehouse as a constituent part to make a pesticide which is
registered under the provisions of this chapter; or ((if)) a written
permit has been obtained from the director to distribute or use the specific
pesticide for experimental purposes subject to restrictions and conditions set
forth in the permit.

Sec. 2. RCW 15.58.070 and 1997 c
242 s 2 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) ((Any person
desiring to register a pesticide with the department shall pay to the director
an annual registration fee for each pesticide registered by the department for
such person. The registration fee shall be one hundred forty-five dollars for
each pesticide registered.

(2) The revenue
generated by the registration)) Except
under subsection (2) of this section:

(a) All
registrations issued by the department to registrants whose names begin with
the letters A through N expire December 31, 2004; and

(b) All
registrations issued by the department to registrants whose names begin with
the letters O through Z expire December 31, 2003.

(2) All
registrations issued by the department to a registrant who is applying to
register an additional pesticide during the second year of the registrant's
registration period shall expire December 31st of that year.

(3) An application
for registration shall be accompanied by a fee of two hundred ninety dollars
for each pesticide, except that:

(a) An application
for registration submitted by a registrant whose name begins with the letters O
through Z shall be accompanied by a fee of one hundred forty-five dollars for
each pesticide; and

(b) A registrant who
is applying to register an additional pesticide during the year the
registrant's registration expires shall pay a fee of one hundred forty-five
dollars for each additional pesticide.

(4) Fees shall
be deposited in the agricultural local fund to support the activities of the
pesticide program within the department.

(((3) All pesticide
registrations expire on December 31st of each year. A registrant may elect to
register a pesticide for a two-year period by prepaying for a second year at
the time of registration.

(4))) (5) Any registration approved by the
director and in effect on the ((31st day of December)) last day of
the registration period, for which a renewal application has been made and
the proper fee paid, continues in full force and effect until the director
notifies the applicant that the registration has been renewed, or otherwise
denied in accord with the provision of RCW 15.58.110.

Sec. 3. RCW 15.58.070 and 1997 c
242 s 2 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) ((Any person
desiring to register a pesticide with the department shall pay to the director
an annual registration fee for each pesticide registered by the department for
such person. The registration fee shall be one hundred forty-five dollars for
each pesticide registered.

(2) The revenue
generated by the registration)) All
registrations issued by the department expire December 31st of the following
year except that registrations issued by the department to a registrant who is
applying to register an additional pesticide during the second year of the
registrant's registration period shall expire December 31st of that year.

(2) An application
for registration shall be accompanied by a fee of two hundred ninety dollars
for each pesticide, except that a registrant who is applying to register an
additional pesticide during the year the registrant's registration expires
shall pay a fee of one hundred forty-five dollars for each additional
pesticide.

(3) Fees shall
be deposited in the agricultural local fund to support the activities of the
pesticide program within the department.

(((3) All pesticide
registrations expire on December 31st of each year. A registrant may elect to
register a pesticide for a two-year period by prepaying for a second year at
the time of registration.))

(4) Any registration
approved by the director and in effect on the ((31st day of December)) last
day of the registration period, for which a renewal application has been
made and the proper fee paid, continues in full force and effect until the
director notifies the applicant that the registration has been renewed, or
otherwise denied in accord with the provision of RCW 15.58.110.

Sec. 4. RCW 15.58.080 and 1994 c
46 s 2 are each amended to read as follows:

If the renewal of a
pesticide registration or special needs registration is not filed ((before
January 1st of each year)) by the day the registration expires, an
additional fee of ((twenty-five)) fifty dollars shall be assessed
and added to the original fee. The additional fee shall be paid by the
applicant before the registration renewal for that pesticide shall be issued
unless the applicant furnishes an affidavit certifying that the applicant did
not distribute the unregistered pesticide during the period of
nonregistration. The payment of the additional fee is not a bar to any
prosecution for doing business without proper registry.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
5. (1) Section 2 of this act
takes effect January 1, 2003.

(2) Section 2 of this
act expires January 1, 2004.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 6. Section 3 of this act takes
effect January 1, 2004.

---
END ---