BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF
WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec.
1. A new section is added
to chapter 4.16 RCW to read as follows:

If a
facility is required by a governmental entity to accept certain clients in
order to enter into a contract with the governmental entity, there is no
liability on the part of the facility, including the owners, officers, agents,
employees, or volunteers of the facility, for any damages to persons or
property sustained or caused by the clients as a result of any act or omission
on the part of the facility that does not constitute intentional misconduct or
gross negligence on the part of the facility. All legal liability for damages
sustained or caused by the clients as a result of an act or omission on the
part of the facility that does not constitute intentional misconduct or gross
negligence on the part of the facility is the obligation of the state of
Washington. Suits may be instituted and maintained against the state for the
enforcement of the liability, for the indemnification of the facility, or for a
judgment against the facility for acts or omissions that do not constitute
intentional misconduct or gross negligence on the part of the facility.

--- END ---