BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF
WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec.
1. A number of statutory
references require cities and towns to send completed copies of their final
budgets to the association of Washington cities. It is actually the municipal
research and services center of Washington that stores the final budgets of cities
and towns in their municipal library. It is the legislature's intent to amend
the law to require cities and towns to transmit completed copies of their final
budgets directly to the municipal research and services center rather than to
the association of Washington cities.

Sec. 2. RCW 35.33.075 and 1995 c
301 s 41 are each amended to read as follows:

Following conclusion of
the hearing, and prior to the beginning of the fiscal year, the legislative
body shall make such adjustments and changes as it deems necessary or proper
and after determining the allowance in each item, department, classification
and fund, and shall by ordinance, adopt the budget in its final form and
content. Appropriations shall be limited to the total estimated revenues
contained therein including the amount to be raised by ad valorem taxes and the
unencumbered fund balances estimated to be available at the close of the
current fiscal year. Such ordinances may adopt the final budget by reference: PROVIDED,
That the ordinance adopting such budget shall set forth in summary form the
totals of estimated revenues and appropriations for each separate fund and the
aggregate totals for all such funds combined.

A complete copy of the
final budget as adopted shall be transmitted to the ((association of
Washington cities)) municipal research council or its designee.

Sec. 3. RCW 35.34.120 and 1995 c
301 s 45 are each amended to read as follows:

Following conclusion of
the hearing, and prior to the beginning of the fiscal biennium, the legislative
body shall make such adjustments and changes as it deems necessary or proper
and, after determining the allowance in each item, department, classification,
and fund, shall by ordinance adopt the budget in its final form and content.
Appropriations shall be limited to the total estimated revenues contained
therein including the amount to be raised by ad valorem taxes and the
unencumbered fund balances estimated to be available at the close of the
current fiscal biennium. Such ordinances may adopt the final budget by
reference. However, the ordinance adopting the budget shall set forth in
summary form the totals of estimated revenues and appropriations for each
separate fund and the aggregate totals for all such funds combined.

A complete copy of the
final budget as adopted shall be transmitted to the state auditor and to the ((association
of Washington cities)) municipal research council or its designee.

Sec. 4. RCW 35.34.130 and 1995 c
301 s 46 are each amended to read as follows:

The legislative
authority of a city or town having adopted the provisions of this chapter shall
provide by ordinance for a mid-biennial review and modification of the biennial
budget. The ordinance shall provide that such review and modification shall
occur no sooner than eight months after the start nor later than conclusion of
the first year of the fiscal biennium. The chief administrative officer shall
prepare the proposed budget modification and shall provide for publication of
notice of hearings consistent with publication of notices for adoption of other
city or town ordinances. City or town ordinances providing for a mid-biennium
review and modification shall establish procedures for distribution of the
proposed modification to members of the city or town legislative authority,
procedures for making copies available to the public, and shall provide for
public hearings on the proposed budget modification. The budget modification
shall be by ordinance approved in the same manner as are other ordinances of
the city or town.

A complete copy of the
budget modification as adopted shall be transmitted to the state auditor and to
the ((association of Washington cities)) municipal research council
or its designee.

Sec. 5. RCW 35A.33.075 and 1995
c 301 s 53 are each amended to read as follows:

Following conclusion of
the hearing, and prior to the beginning of the fiscal year, the legislative
body shall make such adjustments and changes as it deems necessary or proper
and after determining the allowance in each item, department, classification
and fund, and shall by ordinance, adopt the budget in its final form and
content. Appropriations shall be limited to the total estimated revenues
contained therein including the amount to be raised by ad valorem taxes and the
unencumbered fund balances estimated to be available at the close of the
current fiscal year. Such ordinances may adopt the final budget by reference:
PROVIDED, That the ordinance adopting such budget shall set forth in summary
form the totals of estimated revenues and appropriations for each separate fund
and the aggregate totals for all such funds combined.

A complete copy of the
final budget as adopted shall be transmitted to the state auditor((,))
and to the ((association of Washington cities)) municipal research
council or its designee.

Sec. 6. RCW 35A.34.120 and 1995
c 301 s 57 are each amended to read as follows:

Following conclusion of
the hearing, and prior to the beginning of the fiscal biennium, the legislative
body shall make such adjustments and changes as it deems necessary or proper
and, after determining the allowance in each item, department, classification,
and fund, shall by ordinance adopt the budget in its final form and content.
Appropriations shall be limited to the total estimated revenues contained
therein including the amount to be raised by ad valorem taxes and the
unencumbered fund balances estimated to be available at the close of the
current fiscal biennium. Such ordinances may adopt the final budget by
reference. However, the ordinance adopting the budget shall set forth in
summary form the totals of estimated revenues and appropriations for each
separate fund and the aggregate totals for all such funds combined.

A complete copy of the
final budget as adopted shall be transmitted to the state auditor and to the ((association
of Washington cities)) municipal research council or its designee.

Sec. 7. RCW 35A.34.130 and 1995
c 301 s 58 are each amended to read as follows:

The legislative
authority of a city having adopted the provisions of this chapter shall provide
by ordinance for a mid-biennial review and modification of the biennial
budget. The ordinance shall provide that such review and modification shall
occur no sooner than eight months after the start nor later than conclusion of
the first year of the fiscal biennium. The chief administrative officer shall
prepare the proposed budget modification and shall provide for publication of
notice of hearings consistent with publication of notices for adoption of other
city ordinances. City ordinances providing for a mid‑biennium review and
modification shall establish procedures for distribution of the proposed
modification to members of the city legislative authority, procedures for
making copies available to the public, and shall provide for public hearings on
the proposed budget modification. The budget modification shall be by
ordinance approved in the same manner as are other ordinances of the city.

A complete
copy of the budget modification as adopted shall be transmitted to the state
auditor and to the ((association of Washington cities)) municipal
research council or its designee.

---
END ---