BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF
WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec.
1. The open public meetings
act provides that a special meeting may be called by the presiding officer or
by a majority of the members of a city or town council.

The statute relating to
special meetings for mayor-council second class cities allows only the mayor to
call a special meeting and not a majority of the council.

The statute relating to
special meetings for code cities allows the mayor or any three councilmembers
to call a special meeting, but that is not a majority in cities that have a
seven-member council.

It is the legislature's
intent to amend the laws relating to special meetings for second class cities
and code cities to make them consistent with the open public meetings act.

Sec. 2. RCW 35.23.181 and 1993 c
199 s 2 are each amended to read as follows:

The city council and
mayor shall meet in January next succeeding the date of each general municipal
election, and shall take the oath of office, and shall hold regular meetings at
least once during each month but not to exceed one regular meeting in each week,
at such times as may be fixed by ordinance.

Special meetings may be
called by the mayor or by a majority of the members of the city council
by written notice as provided in RCW 42.30.080. No ordinances shall be passed
or contract let or entered into, or bill for the payment of money allowed at
any special meeting.

All meetings of the
city council shall be held at such place as may be designated by the city
council. All final actions on resolutions and ordinances must take place
within the corporate limits of the city. All meetings of the city council must
be public.

Sec. 3. RCW 35A.12.110 and 1993
c 199 s 3 are each amended to read as follows:

The city
council and mayor shall meet regularly, at least once a month, at a place and
at such times as may be designated by the city council. All final actions on
resolutions and ordinances must take place within the corporate limits of the
city. Special meetings may be called by the mayor or ((any three)) by
a majority of the members of the council by written notice delivered to
each member of the council at least twenty-four hours before the time specified
for the proposed meeting. All actions that have heretofore been taken at
special council meetings held pursuant to this section, but for which the
number of hours of notice given has been at variance with requirements of RCW
42.30.080, are hereby validated. All council meetings shall be open to the
public except as permitted by chapter 42.30 RCW. No ordinance or resolution
shall be passed, or contract let or entered into, or bill for the payment of
money allowed at any meeting not open to the public, nor at any public meeting
the date of which is not fixed by ordinance, resolution, or rule, unless public
notice of such meeting has been given by such notice to each local newspaper of
general circulation and to each local radio or television station, as provided
in RCW 42.30.080 ((as now or hereafter amended)). Meetings of the
council shall be presided over by the mayor, if present, or otherwise by the
mayor pro tempore, or deputy mayor if one has been appointed, or by a member of
the council selected by a majority of the council members at such meeting.
Appointment of a council member to preside over the meeting shall not in any
way abridge his or her right to vote on matters coming before the
council at such meeting. In the absence of the clerk, a deputy clerk or other
qualified person appointed by the clerk, the mayor, or the council, may perform
the duties of clerk at such meeting. A journal of all proceedings shall be
kept, which shall be a public record.

---
END ---