BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF
WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec.
1. Incorporations and
annexations are exempt from the state environmental policy act. However, there
are no comparable exemptions for reductions of city limits or
disincorporations. It is the legislature's intent to provide that a reduction
in city limits or disincorporation is not subject to the state environmental
policy act.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
2. A new section is added
to chapter 43.21C RCW to read as follows:

(1) The
disincorporation of a city or town is exempt from compliance with this chapter.

(2) The
reduction of city or town limits is exempt from compliance with this chapter.

---
END ---