BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF
WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1. RCW 70.24.100 and 1991 c
3 s 323 are each amended to read as follows:

A standard
serological test shall be a laboratory test for syphilis approved by the
secretary of health ((and)). The standard serological test shall
be performed either by a laboratory approved by the secretary of health for the
performance of the particular serological test used or by the state department
of health, on request of the physician ((free of charge)) and payment
of a fee established by the department under RCW 43.20B.020.

--- END ---