BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF
WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1. RCW 24.03.065 and 1986 c
240 s 12 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) A
corporation may have one or more classes of members or may have no members. If
the corporation has one or more classes of members, the designation of such
class or classes, the manner of election or appointment and the qualifications
and rights of the members of each class shall be set forth in the articles of
incorporation or the bylaws. Unless otherwise specified in the articles of
incorporation or the bylaws, an individual, domestic or foreign profit or
nonprofit corporation, a general or limited partnership, an association,
or other entity may be a member of a corporation. If the corporation has no
members, that fact shall be set forth in the articles of incorporation or the
bylaws. A corporation may issue certificates evidencing membership therein.

(2) The board of
directors may designate member committees to carry out the business of the
corporation. However, a committee does not have the authority to amend, alter,
or repeal the corporation's bylaws; elect, appoint, or remove any member of any
committee or any director or officer of the corporation; amend the articles of
incorporation; adopt a plan of merger or plan of consolidation with another
corporation; authorize the sale, lease, or exchange of all or substantially all
of the property and assets of the corporation; authorize the voluntary dissolution
of the corporation or revoke proceedings thereof; adopt a plan for the
distribution of the assets of the corporation; or amend, alter, or repeal any
resolution of the board of directors which by its terms provides that it may
not be amended, altered, or repealed by such a committee.

Sec. 2. RCW 24.03.075 and 1986 c
240 s 14 are each amended to read as follows:

(1)(a) Meetings
of members may be held at such place, either within or without this state, as
may be stated in or fixed in accordance with the bylaws. In the absence of any
such provision, all meetings shall be held at the registered office of the
corporation in this state.

(b) An annual
meeting of the members shall be held at such time as may be stated in or fixed
in accordance with the bylaws. Failure to hold the annual meeting at the
designated time shall not work a forfeiture or dissolution of the corporation.

(c) Special
meetings of the members may be called by the president or by the board of
directors. Special meetings of the members may also be called by such other
officers or persons or number or proportion of members as may be provided in
the articles of incorporation or the bylaws. In the absence of a provision
fixing the number or proportion of members entitled to call a meeting, a
special meeting of members may be called by members having one-twentieth of the
votes entitled to be cast at such meeting.

(2) Except as
may be otherwise restricted by the articles of incorporation or the bylaws,
members and committees designated by the board of directors of the
corporation may participate in a meeting of members or a committee by
means of (a) a conference telephone or similar communications equipment
by means of which all persons participating in the meeting can hear each other
at the same time ((and)), or (b) in the case of a meeting by a
committee designated by the board of directors, electronic mail provided no
committee member objects to using this procedure and subsection (3) of this
section has been complied with. Participation ((by such means shall))
under (a) or (b) of this subsection constitutes presence in
person at a meeting.

(3)(a) Participation
in committee meetings by the use of electronic mail is allowed only if (i) the
proposed recipient of any electronic transmission has previously consented in
writing to receive the electronic communication, and (ii) the electronic
communication is capable of being reproduced in a traditional paper format by
both the sender and the recipient.

(b) Any person who
has consented to receive electronic communications may revoke this consent by
delivering a written revocation to the corporation.

(4) For purposes of
this section, "electronic mail" means the transmission and reception
of electronic communication.

The application of
this section to electronic communication does not amend or modify RCW
24.03.465.

Sec. 3. RCW 24.03.120 and 1986 c
240 s 21 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) Meetings of
the board of directors, regular or special, may be held either within or without
this state.

(2) Regular
meetings of the board of directors or of any committee designated by the board
of directors may be held with or without notice as prescribed in the bylaws.
Special meeting of the board of directors or any committee designated by the
board of directors shall be held upon such notice as is prescribed in the
bylaws. Attendance of a director or a committee member at a meeting shall
constitute a waiver of notice of such meeting, except where a director or a
committee member attends a meeting for the express purpose of objecting to the
transaction of any business because the meeting is not lawfully called or
convened. Neither the business to be transacted at, nor the purpose of, any
regular or special meeting of the board of directors or any committee
designated by the board of directors need be specified in the notice or waiver
of notice of such meeting unless required by the bylaws.

(3) Except as
may be otherwise restricted by the articles of incorporation or bylaws, members
of the board of directors or any committee designated by the board of directors
may participate in a meeting of such board or committee by means of (a)
a conference telephone or similar communications equipment by means of which
all persons participating in the meeting can hear each other at the same time
((and)), or (b) in the case of a meeting of a committee of the board
of directors, electronic mail provided no committee member objects to using
this procedure and subsection (4) of this section has been complied with. Participation
((by such means shall)) under (a) or (b) of this subsection
constitutes presence in person at a meeting.

(4)(a) Participation
in committee meetings by the use of electronic mail is allowed only if (i) the
proposed recipient of any electronic transmission has previously consented in
writing to receive the electronic communication, and (ii) the electronic
communication is capable of being reproduced in a traditional paper format by
both the sender and the recipient.

(b) Any person who
has consented to receive electronic communications may revoke this consent by
delivering a written revocation to the corporation.

(5) For purposes of
this section, "electronic mail" means the transmission and reception
of electronic communication.

The
application of this section to electronic communication does not amend or
modify RCW 24.03.465.

---
END ---