BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF
WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec.
1. FINDING‑-INTENT. The legislature finds
that financially needy students, especially those with dependents, are finding
it increasingly difficult to stay in school due to the high costs of caring for
their dependent children.

The legislature intends
to establish an educational assistance grant program, funded through gifts,
grants, or endowments from private sources, for students with dependents who
have additional financial needs due to the care they provide for their
dependents eighteen years of age or younger.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
2. PROGRAM CREATED. The
educational assistance grant program for students with dependents is hereby
created, subject to the availability of receipts of gifts, grants, or
endowments from private sources. The program is created to serve financially
needy students with dependents eighteen years of age or younger, by assisting
them directly through a grant program to pursue a degree or certificate at
public or private institutions of higher education, as defined in RCW 28B.10.802,
that participate in the state need grant program.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
3. DEFINITION‑-ELIGIBILITY.
To be eligible for the educational assistance grant program for students with
dependents, applicants shall: (1) Be residents of the state of Washington; (2)
be needy students as defined in RCW 28B.10.802(3); (3) be eligible to
participate in the state need grant program as set forth under RCW 28B.10.810;
and (4) have dependents eighteen years of age or younger who are under their
care.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
4. ACCOUNT CREATION. (1)
The students with dependents grant account is created in the custody of the
state treasurer. All receipts from the program shall be deposited into the
account. Only the higher education coordinating board, or its designee, may
authorize expenditures from the account. The account is subject to allotment
procedures under chapter 43.88 RCW, but no appropriation is required for
expenditures.

(2) The board may
solicit and receive gifts, grants, or endowments from private sources that are
made from time to time, in trust or otherwise, for the use and benefit of the
purposes of the educational assistance grant program. The executive director,
or the executive director's designee, may spend gifts, grants, or endowments or
income from the private sources according to their terms unless the receipt of
the gifts, grants, or endowments violates RCW 42.17.710.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
5. ADMINISTRATION OF PROGRAM‑-PAYMENTS
TO PARTICIPANTS. The higher education coordinating board shall develop and
administer the educational assistance grant program for students with
dependents. The higher education coordinating board shall adopt necessary
rules and guidelines and develop criteria and procedures to identify eligible
participants in the program.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
6. USE OF GRANTS. The
educational assistance grant program for students with dependents grants may be
used by eligible participants to attend any public or private college or
university in the state of Washington as defined in RCW 28B.10.802. The
participant is not eligible for a grant if the grant will be used to pursue a
degree in theology. Each participating student may receive an amount to be
determined by the higher education coordinating board, with a minimum amount of
one thousand dollars per academic year, not to exceed the student's documented
financial need for the course of study as determined by the institution.

Educational assistance
grants for students with dependents are not intended to supplant any grant
scholarship or tax program related to postsecondary education. If the higher
education coordinating board finds that the educational assistance grants for
students with dependents supplant or reduce any grant, scholarship, or tax
program for categories of students, then the higher education coordinating
board shall adjust the financial eligibility criteria or the amount of the
grant to the level necessary to avoid supplanting.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
7. This chapter may be known
and cited as the gaining independence for students with dependents program.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
8. A new section is added
to chapter 74.04 RCW to read as follows:

For purposes of RCW
74.04.005 (10) and (11), "resource" and "income" do not
include educational assistance awarded under the gaining independence for
students with dependents program as defined in this act for recipients of
temporary assistance for needy families.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
9. Captions used in this act
are not any part of the law.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 10. Sections 1 through 7 and
9 of this act constitute a new chapter in Title 28B RCW.

---
END ---