BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF
WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1. RCW 41.05.021 and 1999 c
372 s 4 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) The Washington
state health care authority is created within the executive branch. The
authority shall have an administrator appointed by the governor, with the
consent of the senate. The administrator shall serve at the pleasure of the
governor. The administrator may employ up to seven staff members, who shall be
exempt from chapter 41.06 RCW, and any additional staff members as are
necessary to administer this chapter. The administrator may delegate any power
or duty vested in him or her by this chapter, including authority to make final
decisions and enter final orders in hearings conducted under chapter 34.05
RCW. The primary duties of the authority shall be to: Administer state
employees' insurance benefits and retired or disabled school employees'
insurance benefits; administer the basic health plan pursuant to chapter 70.47
RCW; study state-purchased health care programs in order to maximize cost
containment in these programs while ensuring access to quality health care; and
implement state initiatives, joint purchasing strategies, and techniques for
efficient administration that have potential application to all state-purchased
health services. The authority's duties include, but are not limited to, the
following:

(a) To administer
health care benefit programs for employees and retired or disabled school
employees as specifically authorized in RCW 41.05.065 and in accordance with
the methods described in RCW 41.05.075, 41.05.140, and other provisions of this
chapter;

(b) To analyze
state-purchased health care programs and to explore options for cost
containment and delivery alternatives for those programs that are consistent
with the purposes of those programs, including, but not limited to:

(i) Creation of
economic incentives for the persons for whom the state purchases health care to
appropriately utilize and purchase health care services, including the
development of flexible benefit plans to offset increases in individual
financial responsibility;

(ii) Utilization of
provider arrangements that encourage cost containment, including but not
limited to prepaid delivery systems, utilization review, and prospective
payment methods, and that ensure access to quality care, including assuring
reasonable access to local providers, especially for employees residing in
rural areas;

(iii) Coordination of
state agency efforts to purchase drugs effectively as provided in RCW
70.14.050;

(iv) Development of
recommendations and methods for purchasing medical equipment and supporting
services on a volume discount basis; and

(v) Development of data
systems to obtain utilization data from state-purchased health care programs in
order to identify cost centers, utilization patterns, provider and hospital
practice patterns, and procedure costs, utilizing the information obtained
pursuant to RCW 41.05.031;

(c) To analyze areas of
public and private health care interaction;

(d) To provide
information and technical and administrative assistance to the board;

(e) To review and
approve or deny applications from counties, municipalities, and other political
subdivisions of the state to provide state-sponsored insurance or
self-insurance programs to their employees in accordance with the provisions of
RCW 41.04.205, setting the premium contribution for approved groups as outlined
in RCW 41.05.050;

(f) To appoint a health
care policy technical advisory committee as required by RCW 41.05.150;

(g) To establish
billing procedures and collect funds from school districts and educational
service districts under RCW 28A.400.400 in a way that minimizes the administrative
burden on districts; ((and))

(h) To publish and
distribute to nonparticipating school districts and educational service
districts by October 1st of each year a description of health care benefit
plans available through the authority and the estimated cost if school
districts and educational service district employees were enrolled; and

(i) To
promulgate and adopt rules consistent with this chapter as described in RCW
41.05.160.

(2) On and after
January 1, 1996, the public employees' benefits board may implement strategies
to promote managed competition among employee health benefit plans. Strategies
may include but are not limited to:

(a) Standardizing the
benefit package;

(b) Soliciting
competitive bids for the benefit package;

(c) Limiting the
state's contribution to a percent of the lowest priced qualified plan within a
geographical area;

(d) Monitoring the
impact of the approach under this subsection with regards to: Efficiencies in
health service delivery, cost shifts to subscribers, access to and choice of
managed care plans state-wide, and quality of health services. The health care
authority shall also advise on the value of administering a benchmark
employer-managed plan to promote competition among managed care plans.

Sec. 2. RCW 41.05.050 and 1995
1st sp.s. c 6 s 22 and 1994 c 153 s 4 are each reenacted and amended to read as
follows:

(1) Every department,
division, or separate agency of state government, and such county, municipal,
school district, educational service district, or other political subdivisions
as are covered by this chapter, shall provide contributions to insurance and
health care plans for its employees and their dependents, the content of such
plans to be determined by the authority. Contributions, paid by the county,
the municipality, ((school district, educational service district,)) or
other political subdivision for their employees, shall include an amount
determined by the authority to pay such administrative expenses of the
authority as are necessary to administer the plans for employees of those
groups((. Until October 1, 1995, contributions to be paid by school
districts or educational service districts shall be adjusted by the authority
to reflect the remittance provided under RCW 28A.400.400)), except as
provided in subsection (3) of this section.

(2) The contributions
of any department, division, or separate agency of the state government, and
such county, municipal, or other political subdivisions as are covered by this
chapter, shall be set by the authority, subject to the approval of the governor
for availability of funds as specifically appropriated by the legislature for
that purpose. Insurance and health care contributions for ferry employees
shall be governed by RCW 47.64.270.

(3)(a) Beginning
September 1, 2002, school districts and educational service districts shall be
charged the same composite rate as state agencies, plus the same amounts for
employee premiums by plan and family size as are charged to state employees,
for groups of district employees enrolled in authority plans as of January 1,
2002.

(b) For all groups
of district employees enrolling in authority plans for the first time after
September 1, 2002, the authority shall charge districts the same composite rate
charged to state agencies, plus the same amounts for employee premiums by plan
and by family size as are charged to state employees, only if the authority
determines that this method of billing the districts will not result in a
material difference between revenues from districts and expenditures made by
the authority on behalf of districts and their employees.

(c) If the authority
determines at any time that the conditions in (b) of this subsection cannot be
met, the authority shall offer enrollment to additional groups of district
employees on a tiered rate structure until such time as the authority
determines there would be no material difference between revenues and
expenditures under a composite rate structure for all district employees
enrolled in authority plans.

(d) The authority
may charge districts a one-time set-up fee for employee groups enrolling in
authority plans for the first time.

(e) For the purposes
of this subsection:

(i)
"District" means school district and educational service district;
and

(ii) "Tiered
rates" means the amounts the authority must pay to insuring entities by
plan and by family size.

(4) The
authority shall transmit a recommendation for the amount of the employer
contribution to the governor and the director of financial management for
inclusion in the proposed budgets submitted to the legislature.

Sec. 3. RCW 41.05.065 and 1996 c
140 s 1 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) The board shall
study all matters connected with the provision of health care coverage, life
insurance, liability insurance, accidental death and dismemberment insurance,
and disability income insurance or any of, or a combination of, the enumerated types
of insurance for employees and their dependents on the best basis possible with
relation both to the welfare of the employees and to the state. However,
liability insurance shall not be made available to dependents.

(2) The board shall
develop employee benefit plans that include comprehensive health care benefits
for all employees. In developing these plans, the board shall consider the
following elements:

(a) Methods of
maximizing cost containment while ensuring access to quality health care;

(b) Development of
provider arrangements that encourage cost containment and ensure access to
quality care, including but not limited to prepaid delivery systems and
prospective payment methods;

(c) Wellness incentives
that focus on proven strategies, such as smoking cessation, injury and accident
prevention, reduction of alcohol misuse, appropriate weight reduction,
exercise, automobile and motorcycle safety, blood cholesterol reduction, and
nutrition education;

(d) Utilization review
procedures including, but not limited to a cost-efficient method for prior
authorization of services, hospital inpatient length of stay review,
requirements for use of outpatient surgeries and second opinions for surgeries,
review of invoices or claims submitted by service providers, and performance
audit of providers;

(e) Effective
coordination of benefits;

(f) Minimum standards
for insuring entities; and

(g) Minimum scope and
content of public employee benefit plans to be offered to enrollees
participating in the employee health benefit plans. To maintain the
comprehensive nature of employee health care benefits, employee eligibility
criteria related to the number of hours worked and the benefits provided to
employees shall be substantially equivalent to the state employees' health
benefits plan and eligibility criteria in effect on January 1, 1993. Nothing
in this subsection (2)(g) shall prohibit changes or increases in employee
point-of-service payments or employee premium payments for benefits.

(3) The board shall
design benefits and determine the terms and conditions of employee
participation and coverage, including establishment of eligibility criteria. The
same terms and conditions of participation and coverage, including eligibility
criteria, shall apply to state employees and to school district employees and
educational service district employees.

(4) The board may
authorize premium contributions for an employee and the employee's dependents
in a manner that encourages the use of cost-efficient managed health care systems.
The board shall require participating school district and educational
service district employees to pay the same employee premiums by plan and family
size as state employees pay.

(5) Employees shall
choose participation in one of the health care benefit plans developed by the
board and may be permitted to waive coverage under terms and conditions
established by the board.

(6) The board shall
review plans proposed by insuring entities that desire to offer property
insurance and/or accident and casualty insurance to state employees through
payroll deduction. The board may approve any such plan for payroll deduction
by insuring entities holding a valid certificate of authority in the state of
Washington and which the board determines to be in the best interests of
employees and the state. The board shall promulgate rules setting forth
criteria by which it shall evaluate the plans.

(7) Before January 1,
1998, the public employees' benefits board shall make available one or more
fully insured long-term care insurance plans that comply with the requirements
of chapter 48.84 RCW. Such programs shall be made available to eligible
employees, retired employees, and retired school employees as well as eligible
dependents which, for the purpose of this section, includes the parents of the
employee or retiree and the parents of the spouse of the employee or retiree.
Employees of local governments and employees of political subdivisions not
otherwise enrolled in the public employees' benefits board sponsored medical
programs may enroll under terms and conditions established by the
administrator, if it does not jeopardize the financial viability of the public
employees' benefits board's long-term care offering.

(a) Participation of
eligible employees or retired employees and retired school employees in any
long-term care insurance plan made available by the public employees' benefits
board is voluntary and shall not be subject to binding arbitration under
chapter 41.56 RCW. Participation is subject to reasonable underwriting
guidelines and eligibility rules established by the public employees' benefits
board and the health care authority.

(b) The employee,
retired employee, and retired school employee are solely responsible for the
payment of the premium rates developed by the health care authority. The
health care authority is authorized to charge a reasonable administrative fee
in addition to the premium charged by the long-term care insurer, which shall
include the health care authority's cost of administration, marketing, and
consumer education materials prepared by the health care authority and the
office of the insurance commissioner.

(c) To the extent
administratively possible, the state shall establish an automatic payroll or
pension deduction system for the payment of the long-term care insurance
premiums.

(d) The public
employees' benefits board and the health care authority shall establish a
technical advisory committee to provide advice in the development of the
benefit design and establishment of underwriting guidelines and eligibility
rules. The committee shall also advise the board and authority on effective
and cost-effective ways to market and distribute the long-term care product.
The technical advisory committee shall be comprised, at a minimum, of
representatives of the office of the insurance commissioner, providers of
long-term care services, licensed insurance agents with expertise in long-term
care insurance, employees, retired employees, retired school employees, and
other interested parties determined to be appropriate by the board.

(e) The health care
authority shall offer employees, retired employees, and retired school
employees the option of purchasing long-term care insurance through licensed
agents or brokers appointed by the long-term care insurer. The authority, in
consultation with the public employees' benefits board, shall establish
marketing procedures and may consider all premium components as a part of the
contract negotiations with the long-term care insurer.

(f) In developing the
long-term care insurance benefit designs, the public employees' benefits board
shall include an alternative plan of care benefit, including adult day
services, as approved by the office of the insurance commissioner.

(g) The health care
authority, with the cooperation of the office of the insurance commissioner,
shall develop a consumer education program for the eligible employees, retired
employees, and retired school employees designed to provide education on the
potential need for long-term care, methods of financing long-term care, and the
availability of long-term care insurance products including the products
offered by the board.

(h) By December 1998,
the health care authority, in consultation with the public employees' benefits
board, shall submit a report to the appropriate committees of the legislature,
including an analysis of the marketing and distribution of the long-term care
insurance provided under this section.

Sec. 4. RCW 41.05.075 and 1994
sp.s. c 9 s 724, 1994 c 309 s 3, and 1994 c 153 s 6 are each reenacted and
amended to read as follows:

(1) The administrator
shall provide benefit plans designed by the board through a contract or
contracts with insuring entities, through self-funding, self-insurance, or
other methods of providing insurance coverage authorized by RCW 41.05.140.

(2) The administrator
shall establish a contract bidding process that:

(a) Encourages
competition among insuring entities;

(b) Maintains an
equitable relationship between premiums charged for similar benefits and
between risk pools including premiums charged for retired state and school
district employees under the separate risk pools established by RCW 41.05.022
and 41.05.080 such that insuring entities may not avoid risk when establishing
the premium rates for retirees eligible for medicare;

(c) Is timely to the
state budgetary process; and

(d) Sets conditions for
awarding contracts to any insuring entity.

(3) The administrator
shall establish a requirement for review of utilization and financial data from
participating insuring entities on a quarterly basis.

(4) The administrator
shall centralize the enrollment files for all employee and retired or disabled
school employee health plans offered under chapter 41.05 RCW and develop
enrollment demographics on a plan-specific basis.

(5) All claims data
shall be the property of the state. The administrator may require of any
insuring entity that submits a bid to contract for coverage all information
deemed necessary including subscriber or member demographic and claims data
necessary for risk assessment and adjustment calculations in order to fulfill
the administrator's duties as set forth in this chapter.

(6) All contracts with
insuring entities for the provision of health care benefits shall provide that
the beneficiaries of such benefit plans may use on an equal participation basis
the services of practitioners licensed pursuant to chapters 18.22, 18.25,
18.32, 18.53, 18.57, 18.71, 18.74, 18.83, and 18.79 RCW, as it applies to
registered nurses and advanced registered nurse practitioners. However,
nothing in this subsection may preclude the administrator from establishing
appropriate utilization controls approved pursuant to RCW 41.05.065(2) (a),
(b), and (d).

(((7)
Beginning in January 1990, and each January thereafter until January 1996, the
administrator shall publish and distribute to each school district a
description of health care benefit plans available through the authority and the
estimated cost if school district employees were enrolled.))

---
END ---