BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF
WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec.
1. This act is intended to
discourage bid shopping and bid peddling on Washington state public building
and works projects.

Sec. 2. RCW 39.30.060 and 1999 c
109 s 1 are each amended to read as follows:

Every
invitation to bid on a prime contract that is expected to cost one
million dollars or more for the construction, alteration, or repair of any
public building or public work of the state or a state agency or municipality
as defined under RCW 39.04.010 or an institution of higher education as defined
under RCW 28B.10.016 shall require each prime contract bidder to submit
as part of the bid, or within one hour after the published bid submittal time,
the names of the subcontractors with whom the bidder, if awarded the contract,
will subcontract for performance of the work of: HVAC (heating,
ventilation, and air conditioning((,))); plumbing as
described in chapter 18.106 RCW((,)); and electrical as described
in chapter 19.28 RCW, or to name itself for the work. The prime contract
bidder shall not list more than one subcontractor for each category of work
identified, unless subcontractors vary with bid alternates, in which case the prime
contract bidder must indicate which subcontractor will be used for which
alternate. Failure of the prime contract bidder to submit as part of
the bid the names of such subcontractors or to name itself to perform such work
or the naming of two or more subcontractors to perform the same work shall
render the prime contract bidder's bid nonresponsive and, therefore,
void. Substitution of a listed subcontractor in furtherance of bid shopping
before or after the award of the prime contract is prohibited and the
originally listed subcontractor is entitled to recover damages from the prime
contract bidder and the substituted subcontractor but not from the public
entity inviting the bid. The requirement of this section to name the prime
contract bidder's proposed ((heating, ventilation and air conditioning))
HVAC, plumbing, and electrical subcontractors applies only to proposed
((heating, ventilation and air conditioning)) HVAC, plumbing, and
electrical subcontractors who will contract directly with the ((general
contractor)) prime contract bidder submitting the bid to the public
entity.

---
END ---