BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF
WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1. RCW 39.12.065 and 2001 c
219 s 2 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) Upon complaint by
an interested party, the director of labor and industries shall cause an
investigation to be made to determine whether there has been compliance with
this chapter and the rules adopted hereunder, and if the investigation
indicates that a violation may have occurred, a hearing shall be held in
accordance with chapter 34.05 RCW. The director shall issue a written
determination including his or her findings after the hearing. A judicial
appeal from the director's determination may be taken in accordance with
chapter 34.05 RCW, with the prevailing party entitled to recover reasonable
costs and attorneys fees.

A complaint concerning
nonpayment of the prevailing rate of wage shall be filed with the department of
labor and industries no later than thirty days from the acceptance date of the
public works project. ((The failure to timely file such a complaint shall
not prohibit a claimant from pursuing)) A claimant or interested party
as defined in RCW 39.12.010 may pursue a private right of action against a
contractor or subcontractor for unpaid prevailing wages notwithstanding that
a timely complaint was not filed with the department of labor and industries.
The remedy provided by this section is not exclusive and is concurrent with any
other remedy provided by law.

(2) To the extent that
a contractor or subcontractor has not paid the prevailing rate of wage under a
determination issued as provided in subsection (1) of this section, the
director shall notify the agency awarding the public works contract of the
amount of the violation found, and the awarding agency shall withhold, or in
the case of a bond, the director shall proceed against the bond in accordance
with the applicable statute to recover, such amount from the following sources
in the following order of priority until the total of such amount is withheld:

(a) The retainage or
bond in lieu of retainage as provided in RCW 60.28.010;

(b) If the claimant was
employed by the contractor or subcontractor on the public works project, the
bond filed by the contractor or subcontractor with the department of labor and
industries as provided in RCW 18.27.040 and 19.28.041;

(c) A surety bond, or
at the contractor's or subcontractor's option an escrow account, running to the
director in the amount of the violation found; and

(d) That portion of the
progress payments which is properly allocable to the contractor or
subcontractor who is found to be in violation of this chapter. Under no
circumstances shall any portion of the progress payments be withheld that are
properly allocable to a contractor, subcontractor, or supplier, that is not
found to be in violation of this chapter.

The amount withheld
shall be released to the director to distribute in accordance with the
director's determination.

(3) A
contractor or subcontractor that is found, in accordance with subsection (1) of
this section, to have violated the requirement to pay the prevailing rate of
wage shall be subject to a civil penalty of not less than one thousand dollars
or an amount equal to twenty percent of the total prevailing wage violation
found on the contract, whichever is greater, and shall not be permitted to bid,
or have a bid considered, on any public works contract until such civil penalty
has been paid in full to the director. If a contractor or subcontractor is
found to have participated in a violation of the requirement to pay the
prevailing rate of wage for a second time within a five-year period, the
contractor or subcontractor shall be subject to the sanctions prescribed in
this subsection and as an additional sanction shall not be allowed to bid on any
public works contract for two years. Civil penalties shall be deposited in the
public works administration account. If a previous or subsequent violation of
a requirement to pay a prevailing rate of wage under federal or other state law
is found against the contractor or subcontractor within five years from a
violation under this section, the contractor or subcontractor shall not be
allowed to bid on any public works contract for two years. A contractor or
subcontractor shall not be barred from bidding on any public works contract if
the contractor or subcontractor relied upon written information from the
department to pay a prevailing rate of wage that is later determined to be in
violation of this chapter. The civil penalty and sanctions under this subsection
shall not apply to a violation determined by the director to be an inadvertent
filing or reporting error. To the extent that a contractor or subcontractor
has not paid the prevailing wage rate under a determination issued as provided
in subsection (1) of this section, the unpaid wages shall constitute a lien
against the bonds and retainage as provided herein and in RCW 18.27.040,
19.28.041, 39.08.010, and 60.28.010.

--- END ---