BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF
WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec.
1. A new section is added
to chapter 70.47 RCW to read as follows:

(1) In coordination
with the department of social and health services medical assistance
administration and interested entities, the administrator will identify and
design pilot projects to improve health care coverage access, including review
of proposals by entities that have received funding through the federal health
resources and services administration community access program. The
administrator may approve pilot projects that are found to be feasible. Pilot
projects may include applying basic health plan or medical assistance subsidy
payments toward employer-sponsored health insurance or other health insurance
premium shares, rather than as direct payments to managed health care systems
participating in the basic health plan or medical assistance program.

(2) The schedule of
benefits for persons enrolled through an approved pilot project may differ from
the benefits offered through the basic health plan, but must be reasonably
comparable in value to those benefits.

(3) By November 1,
2002, the administrator and the secretary of the department of social and
health services shall jointly report to the health care committees of the
senate and the house of representatives on their progress in developing the
pilot projects authorized in this act, the anticipated implementation date of
any pilot project under development, and the resources needed to implement the
pilot project.

Sec. 2. RCW 70.47.020 and 2000 c
79 s 43 are each amended to read as follows:

As used in this
chapter:

(1) "Washington
basic health plan" or "plan" means the system of enrollment and
payment for basic health care services, administered by the plan administrator
through participating managed health care systems, created by this chapter.

(2)
"Administrator" means the Washington basic health plan administrator,
who also holds the position of administrator of the Washington state health
care authority.

(3) "Managed
health care system" means: (a) Any health care organization, including
health care providers, insurers, health care service contractors, health
maintenance organizations, or any combination thereof, that provides directly
or by contract basic health care services, as defined by the administrator and
rendered by duly licensed providers, to a defined patient population enrolled
in the plan and in the managed health care system; or (b) a self-funded or
self-insured method of providing insurance coverage to subsidized enrollees
provided under RCW 41.05.140 and subject to the limitations under RCW 70.47.100(7).

(4) "Subsidized
enrollee" means an individual, or an individual plus the individual's
spouse or dependent children: (a) Who is not eligible for medicare; (b) who is
not confined or residing in a government-operated institution, unless he or she
meets eligibility criteria adopted by the administrator; (c) who resides in an
area of the state served by a managed health care system participating in the
plan; (d) whose gross family income at the time of enrollment does not exceed
two hundred percent of the federal poverty level as adjusted for family size
and determined annually by the federal department of health and human services;
and (e) who chooses to obtain basic health care coverage from a particular
managed health care system in return for periodic payments to the plan. To the
extent that state funds are specifically appropriated for this purpose, with a
corresponding federal match, "subsidized enrollee" also means an
individual, or an individual's spouse or dependent children, who meets the requirements
in (a) through (c) and (e) of this subsection and whose gross family income at
the time of enrollment is more than two hundred percent, but less than two
hundred fifty-one percent, of the federal poverty level as adjusted for family
size and determined annually by the federal department of health and human
services. Upon approval of a pilot project under section 1 of this act,
"subsidized enrollee" also means an individual, or an individual's
spouse or dependent children, who meets the requirements of (a), (b), and (d)
of this subsection, who resides within the state of Washington, and who
qualifies for a premium subsidy under a pilot project approved under section 1
of this act.

(5) "Nonsubsidized
enrollee" means an individual, or an individual plus the individual's
spouse or dependent children: (a) Who is not eligible for medicare; (b) who is
not confined or residing in a government-operated institution, unless he or she
meets eligibility criteria adopted by the administrator; (c) who resides in an
area of the state served by a managed health care system participating in the
plan; (d) who chooses to obtain basic health care coverage from a particular
managed health care system; and (e) who pays or on whose behalf is paid the
full costs for participation in the plan, without any subsidy from the plan.

(6) "Subsidy"
means the difference between the amount of periodic payment the administrator
makes to a managed health care system or through payments developed as part
of a pilot project approved under section 1 of this act on behalf of a
subsidized enrollee plus the administrative cost to the plan of providing the
plan to that subsidized enrollee, and the amount determined to be the
subsidized enrollee's responsibility under RCW 70.47.060(2).

(7) "Premium"
means a periodic payment, based upon gross family income which an individual,
their employer or another financial sponsor makes to the plan as consideration
for enrollment in the plan as a subsidized enrollee or a nonsubsidized
enrollee.

(8)
"Rate" means the amount, negotiated by the administrator with and
paid to a participating managed health care system, that is based upon the
enrollment of subsidized and nonsubsidized enrollees in the plan and in that
system.

---
END ---