BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF
WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec.
1. A new section is added
to chapter 49.12 RCW to read as follows:

(1) Without just cause,
an employer may not discharge an employee from employment or take any other
adverse employment action against an employee if:

(a) The employer
required the employee to give notice of his or her intent to terminate his or
her employment;

(b) The employee gave
the employer such notice; and

(c) The employer discharged
or took adverse action against the employee after the employee gave the
employer such notice.

(2) For the purposes of
this section, "just cause" means a fair and honest cause or reason
that is regulated by good faith on the part of the employer, based on facts
supported by substantial evidence, and reasonably believed by the employer to
be true. "Just cause" does not mean an arbitrary, capricious, or
illegal reason.

(3) The employer has
the burden of proving just cause for the discharge or the other adverse
employment action.

(4)(a) An employee who
believes he or she was discharged or subjected to other adverse employment
actions in violation of this section may file a complaint alleging the
violation with the director. The employee may allege a violation only by
filing such a complaint within ninety days of the alleged violation.

(b) Upon receipt of the
complaint, the director must cause an investigation to be made as the director
deems appropriate and must determine whether this section has been violated.
Notice of the director's determination must be sent to the complainant and the
employer within ninety days of receipt of the complaint.

(c) If the director
determines that this section was violated and the employer fails to compensate
the employee for any lost wages and fails to withdraw any other adverse
employment action taken against the employee, within thirty days of receipt of
notice of the director's determination, the employee may bring an action
against the employer alleging a violation of this section and seeking
compensation of lost wages and withdrawal of adverse employment actions.

(d) In any
action brought under this section, the superior court has jurisdiction, for
cause shown, to restrain violations under this section and to order
compensation of lost wages and withdrawal of adverse employment actions.

--- END ---