BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF
WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec.
1. The legislature finds
that single premium credit insurance, when added to a loan balance and
financed, reduces equity in real property and may cost purchasers of credit
insurance thousands of dollars in interest payments. This insurance may also
be sold using deceptive marketing practices.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
2. A new section is added
to chapter 48.30 RCW to read as follows:

(1) An insurer offering
or providing credit insurance in this state shall not offer, deliver, issue for
delivery, cause to be delivered, or sell any form of single premium credit
insurance in connection with a residential mortgage loan in this state. This
section does not preclude an insurer from offering alternatives to single
premium credit insurance. These alternatives must allow for payment of premium
on a monthly basis.

(2) This section does
not apply to residential mortgage loans that meet all of the following
criteria:

(a) The loan amount
does not exceed ten thousand dollars;

(b) The repayment term
of the loan does not exceed five years; and

(c) The repayment term
of the credit insurance premium does not exceed the repayment term of the loan.

(3) For the purpose of
this section:

(a) "Single
premium credit insurance" means any credit insurance where the full
premium is charged to the consumer as a whole sum at or near the inception of
coverage whether that charge is made by the creditor or by the insurer.

(b)
"Residential mortgage loan" means any loan primarily for personal,
family, or household use secured by a mortgage or deed of trust on residential
real estate upon which is constructed or intended to be constructed a
single-family dwelling or multiple-family dwelling of four or less units.

---
END ---