BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF
WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec.
1. A new section is added
to chapter 28A.150 RCW to read as follows:

(1) All public schools
that provide sexuality or abstinence education shall provide only medically and
scientifically accurate information.

(2) As used in this
section, "medically and scientifically accurate information" means
information that is:

(a) Supported by the
weight of research conducted in compliance with accepted scientific methods;

(b) Recognized as
accurate and objective by leading professional organizations and agencies with
relevant expertise in the field, such as the American college of obstetricians
and gynecologists or the centers for disease control; and

(c)
Published in peer-reviewed journals, where appropriate.

Sec. 2. RCW 70.190.085 and 1994
c 299 s 5 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) The
community network's plan may include funding for a student designed media and
community campaign promoting sexual abstinence and addressing the importance of
delaying sexual activity and pregnancy or male parenting until individuals are
ready to nurture and support their children. Under the campaign, which shall
be substantially designed and produced by students, the same messages shall be
distributed in schools, through the media, and in the community where the
campaign is targeted. The campaign shall require local private sector matching
funds equal to state funds. Local private sector funds may include in-kind
contributions of technical or other assistance from consultants or firms
involved in public relations, advertising, broadcasting, and graphics or video
production or other related fields. The campaign shall be evaluated using the
outcomes required of community networks under this chapter, in particular
reductions in the number or rate of teen pregnancies and teen male parentage
over a three to five year period.

(2) Any family
planning information that is provided under this section and includes sexuality
or abstinence education shall provide only medically and scientifically
accurate information. As used in this section, "medically and scientifically
accurate information" means information that is:

(a) Supported by the
weight of research conducted in compliance with accepted scientific methods;

(b) Recognized as
accurate and objective by leading professional organizations and agencies with
relevant expertise in the field, such as the American college of obstetricians
and gynecologists or the centers for disease control; and

(c) Published in
peer-reviewed journals, where appropriate.

Sec. 3. RCW 74.12.410 and 1997 c
58 s 601 are each amended to read as follows:

(1)(a) At time
of application or reassessment under this chapter the department shall offer or
contract for family planning information and assistance, including alternatives
to abortion, and any other available locally based teen pregnancy prevention
programs, to prospective and current recipients of aid to families with
dependent children.

(b) Any plan that
includes funding for a community campaign promoting sexual abstinence that is
provided under this section shall provide only medically and scientifically
accurate information. As used in this section, "medically and
scientifically accurate information" means information that is:

(i) Supported by the
weight of research conducted in compliance with accepted scientific methods;

(ii) Recognized as
accurate and objective by leading professional organizations and agencies with
relevant expertise in the field, such as the American college of obstetricians
and gynecologists or the centers for disease control; and

(iii) Published in
peer-reviewed journals, where appropriate.

(2) The department
shall work in cooperation with the superintendent of public instruction to
reduce the rate of illegitimate births and abortions in Washington state.

(3) The department of
health shall maximize federal funding by timely application for federal funds
available under P.L. 104-193 and Title V of the federal social security act, 42
U.S.C. 701 et seq., as amended, for the establishment of qualifying abstinence
education and motivation programs. The department of health shall contract, by
competitive bid, with entities qualified to provide abstinence education and
motivation programs in the state.

(4) The department of
health shall seek and accept local matching funds to the maximum extent
allowable from qualified abstinence education and motivation programs.

(5)(a) For purposes of
this section, "qualifying abstinence education and motivation
programs" are those bidders with experience in the conduct of the types of
abstinence education and motivation programs set forth in Title V of the
federal social security act, 42 U.S.C. Sec. 701 et seq., as amended.

(b) The
application for federal funds, contracting for abstinence education and
motivation programs and performance of contracts under this section are subject
to review and oversight by a joint committee of the legislature, composed of
four legislative members, appointed by each of the two caucuses in each house.

---
END ---