BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF
WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec.
1. A new section is added
to chapter 47.36 RCW to read as follows:

(1) Local transit
authority bus shelters within the right of way of the state highway system may
display and maintain commercial advertisements subject to applicable federal
regulations, if any. Pursuant to RCW 47.12.120, the department shall lease
state right of way air space to local transit authorities for this purpose,
unless there are significant safety concerns regarding the placement of certain
advertisements.

(2) Advertisements
posted on a local transit authority's bus shelter may not exceed twenty-four
square feet on each side of the panel. One back-to-back panel is allowed on
the downstream side of the shelter.

Sec. 2. RCW 47.36.030 and 1977
ex.s. c 151 s 61 are each amended to read as follows:

The
secretary of transportation shall have the power and it shall be its duty to
adopt and designate a uniform state standard for the manufacture, display,
erection, and location of all signs, signals, signboards, guideposts, and other
traffic devices erected or to be erected upon the state highways of the state
of Washington for the purpose of furnishing information to persons traveling
upon such state highways regarding traffic regulations, directions, distances,
points of danger, and conditions requiring caution, and for the purpose of
imposing restrictions upon persons operating vehicles thereon. Such signs
shall conform as nearly as practicable to the manual of specifications for the
manufacture, display, and erection of uniform traffic control devices for
streets and highways and all amendments, corrections, and additions thereto.
The department of transportation shall prepare plans and specifications of the
uniform state standard of traffic devices so adopted and designated, showing
the materials, colors, and designs thereof, and shall upon the issuance of any
such plans and specifications or revisions thereof and upon request, furnish to
the boards of county commissioners and the governing body of any incorporated
city or town, a copy thereof. Signs, signals, signboards, guideposts, and
other traffic devices erected on county roads shall conform in all respects to
the specifications of color, design, and location approved by the secretary.
Traffic devices hereafter erected within incorporated cities and towns shall
conform to such uniform state standard of traffic devices so far as is practicable.
The uniform system must allow local transit authority bus shelters located
within the right of way of the state highway system to display and maintain
commercial advertisements subject to applicable federal regulations, if any.

---
END ---