BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF
WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1. RCW 43.06.460 and 2001
2nd sp.s. c 21 s 1 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) The governor is
authorized to enter into cigarette tax contracts with the Squaxin Island Tribe,
the Nisqually Tribe, Tulalip Tribes, the Muckleshoot Indian Tribe, the Quinault
Nation, the Jamestown S'Klallam Indian Tribe, the Port Gamble S'Klallam Tribe,
the Stillaguamish Tribe, the Sauk-Suiattle Tribe, the Skokomish Indian Tribe,
the Yakama Nation, the Suquamish Tribe, the Nooksack Indian Tribe, the Lummi
Nation, the Chehalis Confederated Tribes, ((and)) the Upper Skagit Tribe,
the Snoqualmie Tribe, and the Swinomish Tribe. Each contract adopted under
this section shall provide that the tribal cigarette tax rate be one hundred
percent of the state cigarette and state and local sales and use taxes within
three years of enacting the tribal tax and shall be set no lower than eighty
percent of the state cigarette and state and local sales and use taxes during
the three-year phase-in period. The three-year phase-in period shall be
shortened by three months each quarter the number of cartons of nontribal
manufactured cigarettes is at least ten percent or more than the quarterly
average number of cartons of nontribal manufactured cigarettes from the
six-month period preceding the imposition of the tribal tax under the
contract. Sales at a retailer operation not in existence as of the date a
tribal tax under this section is imposed are subject to the full rate of the
tribal tax under the contract. The tribal cigarette tax is in lieu of the
state cigarette and state and local sales and use taxes, as provided in RCW
43.06.455(3).

(2) A
cigarette tax contract under this section is subject to RCW 43.06.455.

--- END ---