BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF
WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec.
1. A new section is added
to chapter 19.27 RCW to read as follows:

The building
code council shall adopt rules by December 1, 2002, requiring that all new
apartment buildings with fifty or more units that are classified as group R,
division 1 apartment buildings as defined in the state building code, and are
built or manufactured in this state after July 31, 2003, be installed with a
minimum of one smoke detection device for hearing impaired persons for each
fifty units.

--- END ---