BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF
WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1. RCW 35.61.010 and 1994 c
81 s 60 are each amended to read as follows:

((Cities of five
thousand or more population and such contiguous property the residents of which
may decide in favor thereof in the manner set forth in this chapter may create))
A metropolitan park district may be created for the management,
control, improvement, maintenance, and acquisition of parks, parkways, ((and))
boulevards, and recreational facilities. A metropolitan park district may
include territory located in portions or all of one or more cities or counties,
or one or more cities and counties, when created or enlarged as provided in
this chapter.

Sec. 2. RCW 35.61.020 and 1965 c
7 s 35.61.020 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) When proposed by
citizen petition or by local government resolution as provided in this section,
a ballot proposition authorizing the creation of a metropolitan park district
shall be submitted by resolution to the voters of the area proposed to be included
in the district at any general election, or at any special election which
may be called for that purpose((, or at any city election held in the city
in all of the various voting precincts thereof, the city council or commission
may, or on petition of fifteen percent of the qualified electors of the city
based upon the registration for the last preceding general city election, shall
by ordinance, submit to the voters of the city the proposition of creating a
metropolitan park district, the limits of which shall be coextensive with the
limits of the city as now or hereafter established, inclusive of territory
annexed to and forming a part of the city)).

(2) The ballot
proposition shall be submitted if the governing body of each city in which all
or a portion of the proposed district is located, and the legislative authority
of each county in which all or a portion of the proposed district is located
within the unincorporated portion of the county, each adopts a resolution
submitting the proposition to create a metropolitan park district.

(3) As an
alternative to the method provided under subsection (2) of this section, the
ballot proposition shall be submitted if a petition proposing creation of a
metropolitan park district is submitted to the county auditor of each county in
which all or a portion of the proposed district is located that is signed by at
least fifteen percent of the registered voters residing in the area to be
included within the proposed district. Where the petition is for creation of a
district in more than one county, the petition shall be filed with the county
auditor of the county having the greater area of the proposed district, and a
copy filed with each other county auditor of the other counties covering the
proposed district.

Territory by virtue of
its annexation to any city ((having heretofore created)) whose
territory lies entirely within a park district shall be deemed to be within
the limits of the metropolitan park district. ((The city council or commission
shall submit the proposition at a special election to be called therefor when
the petition so requests.)) Such an extension of a park district's
boundaries shall not be subject to review by a boundary review board
independent of the board's review of the city annexation of territory.

Sec. 3. RCW 35.61.030 and 1985 c
469 s 32 are each amended to read as follows:

((In submitting the
question to the voters for their approval or rejection, the city council or
commission shall pass an ordinance declaring its intention to submit the
proposition of creating a metropolitan park district to the qualified voters of
the city. The ordinance shall be published once a week for two consecutive
weeks in the official newspaper of the city, and the city council or commission
shall cause to be placed upon the ballot for the election, at the proper place,))

(1) Except as
provided in subsection (2) of this section for review by a boundary review
board, the ballot proposition authorizing creation of a metropolitan park
district that is submitted to voters for their approval or rejection shall
appear on the ballot of the next general election or at the next special
election date specified under RCW 29.13.020 occurring sixty or more days after
the last resolution proposing the creation of the park district is adopted or
the date the county auditor certifies that the petition proposing the creation
of the park district contains sufficient valid signatures. Where the petition
or copy thereof is filed with two or more county auditors in the case of a
proposed district in two or more counties, the county auditors shall confer and
issue a joint certification upon finding that the required number of signatures
on the petition has been obtained.

(2) Where the
proposed district is located wholly or in part in a county in which a boundary
review board has been created, notice of the proposal to create a metropolitan
park district shall be filed with the boundary review board as provided under
RCW 36.93.090 and the special election at which a ballot proposition
authorizing creation of the park district shall be held on the special election
date specified under RCW 29.13.020 that is sixty or more days after the date
the boundary review board is deemed to have approved the proposal, approves the
proposal, or modifies and approves the proposal. The creation of a
metropolitan park district is not subject to review by a boundary review board
if the proposed district only includes one or more cities and in such cases the
special election at which a ballot proposition authorizing creation of the park
district shall be held as if a boundary review board does not exist in the
county or counties.

(3) The petition
proposing the creation of a metropolitan park district, or the resolution
submitting the question to the voters, shall choose and describe the
composition of the initial board of commissioners of the district that is
proposed under RCW 35.61.050 and shall choose a name for the district. The
proposition ((which)) shall ((be expressed in)) include
the following terms:

G "For the formation of
a metropolitan park district."

G "Against the
formation of a metropolitan park district."

Sec. 4. RCW 35.61.040 and 1965 c
7 s 35.61.040 are each amended to read as follows:

If ((at an election))
a majority of the voters voting ((thereon)) on the ballot proposition
authorizing the creation of the metropolitan park district vote in favor of
the formation of a metropolitan park district, the metropolitan park
district shall ((then)) be ((and become)) created as a
municipal corporation effective immediately upon certification of the
election results and its name shall be (("Metropolitan Park
District of . . . . . . (inserting the name of the
city).")) that designated in the ballot proposition.

Sec. 5. RCW 35.61.050 and 1994 c
223 s 23 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) The resolution
or petition submitting the ballot proposition shall designate the composition
of the board of metropolitan park commissioners from among the alternatives
provided under subsections (2) through (4) of this section. The ballot
proposition shall clearly describe the designated composition of the board.

(2) The
commissioners of the district may be selected by election, in which case at
the same election at which the proposition is submitted to the voters as to
whether a metropolitan park district is to be formed, five park commissioners
shall be elected. The election of park commissioners shall be null and void if
the metropolitan park district is not created. Candidates shall run for
specific commission positions. No primary shall be held to nominate
candidates. The person receiving the greatest number of votes for each
position shall be elected as a commissioner. The staggering of the terms of
office shall occur as follows: (((1))) (a) The two persons who
are elected receiving the two greatest numbers of votes shall be elected to
six-year terms of office if the election is held in an odd-numbered year or
five-year terms of office if the election is held in an even-numbered year; (((2)))
(b) the two persons who are elected receiving the next two greatest
numbers of votes shall be elected to four-year terms of office if the election
is held in an odd-numbered year or three-year terms of office if the election
is held in an even-numbered year; and (((3))) (c) the other
person who is elected shall be elected to a two-year term of office if the
election is held in an odd-numbered year or a one-year term of office if the
election is held in an even-numbered year. The initial commissioners shall
take office immediately when they are elected and qualified, and for purposes
of computing their terms of office the terms shall be assumed to commence on
the first day of January in the year after they are elected. Thereafter, all
commissioners shall be elected to six-year terms of office. All commissioners
shall serve until their respective successors are elected and qualified and
assume office in accordance with RCW 29.04.170. Vacancies shall occur and
shall be filled as provided in chapter 42.12 RCW.

(3) In a district
wholly located within a city or within the unincorporated area of a county, the
governing body of such city or legislative authority of such county may be
designated to serve in an ex officio capacity as the board of metropolitan park
commissioners, provided that when creation of the district is proposed by
citizen petition, the city or county approves by resolution such designation.

(4)
Where the proposed district is located within more than one city, more than one
county, or any combination of cities and counties, each city governing body and
county legislative authority may be designated to collectively serve ex officio
as the board of metropolitan park commissioners through selection of one or
more members from each to serve as the board, provided that when creation of
the district is proposed by citizen petition, each city governing body and
county legislative authority approve by resolution such designation. Within
six months of the date of certification of election results approving creation
of the district, the size and membership of the board shall be determined
through interlocal agreement of each city and county. The interlocal agreement
shall specify the method for filling vacancies on the board.

---
END ---