BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF
WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec.
1. A new section is added
to chapter 82.14 RCW to read as follows:

(1) The legislative
authority of a county may submit an authorizing proposition to the voters, and
if the proposition is approved by a majority of those voting on the proposition,
fix and impose a sales and use tax in accordance with this chapter for the
purposes designated in subsection (4) of this section.

(2) The tax authorized
in this section is in addition to any other taxes authorized by law and shall
be collected from those persons who are taxable by the state under chapters
82.08 and 82.12 RCW upon the occurrence of any taxable event within the
county. The rate of tax shall equal no more than one-tenth of one percent of
the selling price in the case of a sales tax, or value of the article used in
the case of a use tax.

(3) The department of
revenue shall perform the collection of this tax on behalf of the county at no
cost to the county.

(4) Money received from
tax imposed under this section shall be used solely for the purpose of
providing funds for operating and maintaining parks and recreational facilities
owned by the county and the cities located within the county in which the tax is
imposed. If a city or county receiving revenues owns no park or recreational
facilities, the revenues may additionally be used for the acquisition and
development of these facilities.

(5) The tax authorized
by this section shall be allocated to the county based on the population the
unincorporated area of the county bears to the total population of the county
and to each city within the county based on the proportion each city's
population bears to the total population of the county, as determined by the most
recent population estimates of the office of financial management. Where a
city lies in more than one county, only the city's population within the county
in which the tax is imposed may be the basis for an allocation under this
subsection.

(6) Money received from
any tax imposed under this section shall not be used to supplant existing
funding of the operation and maintenance of parks and recreational facilities.

(7) The
tax authorized pursuant to this section may not be imposed if the tax authorized
by RCW 82.14.400 is being imposed.

--- END ---