BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF
WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1. RCW 90.80.135 and 2001 c
237 s 18 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) A board is subject
to the requirements of chapter 42.17 RCW. Each board must establish and
maintain records of its proceedings and determinations. Except as provided
in subsection (2) of this section, while in the possession of the board,
all such records must be made available for public inspection and ((copies
must be provided to the public on)) copying upon request under the
provisions of chapter 42.17 RCW.

(2) Upon
the conclusion of its business involving a water right transfer application, a
board must promptly send the original copies of all records relating to that
application to the department for recordkeeping. A board may keep a copy of
the original documents. After the records are transferred to the department,
the responsibility for making the records available under chapter 42.17 RCW is
transferred to the department. Therefore, each request for public
inspection and copying of the records of a water conservancy board must be
filed with the department and must specify the records of the board's
proceedings and determinations being requested. The department must identify
and provide to the requestor a copy of each of the records held in the
possession of the department and must then forward the request for public
inspection and copying for the remaining such records to the conservancy
board. The date of the request regarding these remaining records is the date
the request is received by the board.

--- END ---