BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF
WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec.
1. A new section is added
to chapter 50.20 RCW to read as follows:

No otherwise eligible
individual shall be denied benefits for any week because the individual is
available for, seeks, applies for, or accepts only part-time work of at least
fifteen hours per week, instead of full-time work, by reason of the application
of RCW 50.20.010(3), 50.20.015, 50.20.080, or 50.22.020(1) relating to
availability for work and active search for work, or failure to apply for or
refusal to accept suitable work.

Sec. 2. RCW 50.20.130 and 1983
1st ex.s. c 23 s 12 are each amended to read as follows:

If an eligible
individual is available for work for less than a full week, he shall be paid
his weekly benefit amount reduced by one-seventh of such amount for each day
that he is unavailable for work: PROVIDED, That if he is unavailable for work
for three days or more of a week, he shall be considered unavailable for the
entire week.

Each eligible
individual who ((is unemployed)) has unemployment in any week
shall ((be paid with respect to such week a benefit in an amount equal to
his weekly benefit amount less seventy-five percent of that part of the
remuneration (if any) payable to him with respect to such week which is in
excess of five dollars)) have the individual's weekly benefit amount
reduced by the remuneration, if any, paid or payable that exceeds whichever is
greater of the following amounts:

(1) Ten times the
minimum hourly wage established under RCW 49.46.020 or 29 U.S.C. 206, whichever
is higher; or

(2) One-third of the
individual's weekly benefit amount.

Such benefit, if not a
multiple of one dollar, shall be reduced to the next lower multiple of one
dollar.

Sec. 3. RCW 50.20.010 and 1995 c
381 s 1 are each amended to read as follows:

An unemployed
individual shall be eligible to receive ((waiting period credits or))
benefits with respect to any week in his or her eligibility period only if the
commissioner finds that:

(1) He or she has
registered for work at, and thereafter has continued to report at, an
employment office in accordance with such regulation as the commissioner may
prescribe, except that the commissioner may by regulation waive or alter either
or both of the requirements of this subdivision as to individuals attached to
regular jobs and as to such other types of cases or situations with respect to
which the commissioner finds that the compliance with such requirements would
be oppressive, or would be inconsistent with the purposes of this title;

(2) He or she has filed
an application for an initial determination ((and made a claim for waiting
period credit)) or for benefits in accordance with the provisions of this
title;

(3) He or she is able
to work, and is available for work in any trade, occupation, profession, or
business for which he or she is reasonably fitted. To be available for work an
individual must be ready, able, and willing, immediately to accept any suitable
work which may be offered to him or her and must be actively seeking work
pursuant to customary trade practices and through other methods when so
directed by the commissioner or the commissioner's agents;

(4) ((He or she has
been unemployed for a waiting period of one week;

(5))) He or she participates in reemployment
services if the individual has been referred to reemployment services pursuant
to the profiling system established by the commissioner under RCW 50.20.011,
unless the commissioner determines that:

(a) The individual has
completed such services; or

(b) There is
justifiable cause for the claimant's failure to participate in such services;
and

(((6))) (5)
As to weeks beginning after March 31, 1981, which fall within an extended
benefit period as defined in RCW 50.22.010, the individual meets the terms and
conditions of RCW 50.22.020 with respect to benefits claimed in excess of
twenty-six times the individual's weekly benefit amount.

An individual's
eligibility period for regular benefits shall be coincident to his or her
established benefit year. An individual's eligibility period for additional or
extended benefits shall be the periods prescribed elsewhere in this title for
such benefits.

Sec. 4. RCW 50.20.070 and 1973
1st ex.s. c 158 s 5 are each amended to read as follows:

Irrespective of any
other provisions of this title an individual shall be disqualified for benefits
for any week with respect to which he has knowingly made a false statement or
representation involving a material fact or knowingly failed to report a
material fact and has thereby obtained or attempted to obtain any benefits
under the provisions of this title, and for an additional twenty-six weeks
commencing with the first week for which he completes an otherwise compensable
claim for ((waiting period credit or)) benefits following the date of
the delivery or mailing of the determination of disqualification under this
section: PROVIDED, That such disqualification shall not be applied after two
years have elapsed from the date of the delivery or mailing of the
determination of disqualification under this section, but all overpayments
established by such determination of disqualification shall be collected as
otherwise provided by this title.

Sec. 5. RCW 50.20.095 and 1980 c
74 s 4 are each amended to read as follows:

Any individual
registered at an established school in a course of study providing scholastic
instruction of twelve or more hours per week, or the equivalent thereof, shall
be disqualified from receiving benefits ((or waiting period credit)) for
any week during the school term commencing with the first week of such
scholastic instruction or the week of leaving employment to return to school,
whichever is the earlier, and ending with the week immediately before the first
full week in which the individual is no longer registered for twelve or more
hours of scholastic instruction per week: PROVIDED, That registration for less
than twelve hours will be for a period of sixty days or longer. The term
"school" includes primary schools, secondary schools, and
"institutions of higher education" as that phrase is defined in RCW
50.44.037.

This disqualification
shall not apply to any individual who:

(1) Is in approved
training within the meaning of RCW 50.20.043; or

(2) Demonstrates to the
commissioner by a preponderance of the evidence his or her actual availability
for work, and in arriving at this determination the commissioner shall consider
the following factors:

(a) Prior work history;

(b) Scholastic history;

(c) Past and current
labor market attachment; and

(d) Past and present
efforts to seek work.

Sec. 6. RCW 50.20.140 and 1998 c
161 s 2 are each amended to read as follows:

An application for
initial determination((, a claim for waiting period,)) or a claim for
benefits shall be filed in accordance with such rules as the commissioner may
prescribe. An application for an initial determination may be made by any
individual whether unemployed or not. Each employer shall post and maintain
printed statements of such rules in places readily accessible to individuals in
his or her employment and shall make available to each such individual at the
time he or she becomes unemployed, a printed statement of such rules and such
notices, instructions, and other material as the commissioner may by rule
prescribe. Such printed material shall be supplied by the commissioner to each
employer without cost to the employer.

The term
"application for initial determination" shall mean a request in writing,
or by other means as determined by the commissioner, for an initial
determination. ((The term "claim for waiting period" shall mean a
certification, after the close of a given week, that the requirements stated
herein for eligibility for waiting period have been met.)) The term
"claim for benefits" shall mean a certification, after the close of a
given week, that the requirements stated herein for eligibility for receipt of
benefits have been met.

A representative
designated by the commissioner shall take the application for initial
determination and for the claim for ((waiting period credits or for))
benefits. When an application for initial determination has been made, the
employment security department shall promptly make an initial determination
which shall be a statement of the applicant's base year wages, his or her
weekly benefit amount, his or her maximum amount of benefits potentially
payable, and his or her benefit year. Such determination shall fix the general
conditions under which ((waiting period credit shall be granted and under
which)) benefits shall be paid during any period of unemployment occurring
within the benefit year fixed by such determination.

Sec. 7. RCW 50.20.170 and 1945 c
35 s 85 are each amended to read as follows:

An individual who has
received an initial determination finding that he is potentially entitled to
receive ((waiting period credit or)) benefits shall, during the benefit
year, be ((given waiting period credit or be)) paid benefits in
accordance with such initial determination for any week with respect to which
the conditions of eligibility for such ((credit or)) benefits, as
prescribed by this title, are met, unless the individual is denied ((waiting
period credit or)) benefits under the disqualification provisions of this
title.

All benefits shall be
paid through employment offices in accordance with such regulations as the
commissioner may prescribe.

Sec. 8. RCW 50.20.180 and 1951 c
215 s 7 are each amended to read as follows:

If ((waiting period
credit or)) the payment of benefits shall be denied to any claimant for any
week or weeks, the claimant and such other interested party as the commissioner
by regulation prescribes shall be promptly issued written notice of the denial
and the reasons therefor. In any case where the department is notified in
accordance with such regulation as the commissioner prescribes or has reason to
believe that the claimant's right to ((waiting period credit or))
benefits is in issue because of his separation from work for any reason other
than lack of work, the department shall promptly issue a determination of
allowance or denial of ((waiting period credit or)) benefits and the
reasons therefor to the claimant, his most recent employing unit as stated by
the claimant, and such other interested party as the commissioner by regulation
prescribes. Notice that ((waiting period credit or)) benefits are allowed
or denied shall suffice for the particular weeks stated in the notice or until
the condition upon which the allowance or denial was based has been changed.

Sec. 9. RCW 50.32.040 and 1989 c
175 s 117 are each amended to read as follows:

In any proceeding
before an appeal tribunal involving a dispute of an individual's initial
determination, all matters covered by such initial determination shall be
deemed to be in issue irrespective of the particular ground or grounds set
forth in the notice of appeal.

In any proceeding
before an appeal tribunal involving a dispute of an individual's ((claim for
waiting period credit or)) claim for benefits, all matters and provisions
of this title relating to the individual's right to receive such credit or
benefits for the period in question, including but not limited to the question
and nature of the claimant's availability for work within the meaning of RCW
50.20.010(3) and 50.20.080, shall be deemed to be in issue irrespective of the
particular ground or grounds set forth in the notice of appeal in single
claimant cases. The claimant's availability for work shall be determined apart
from all other matters.

In any proceeding
before an appeal tribunal involving an individual's right to benefits, all
parties shall be afforded an opportunity for hearing after not less than seven
days' notice in accordance with RCW 34.05.434.

In any
proceeding involving an appeal relating to benefit determinations or benefit
claims, the appeal tribunal, after affording the parties reasonable opportunity
for fair hearing, shall render its decision affirming, modifying, or setting
aside the determination or decisions of the unemployment compensation
division. The parties shall be duly notified of such appeal tribunal's
decision together with its reasons therefor, which shall be deemed to be the
final decision on the initial determination or ((the claim for waiting
period credit or)) the claim for benefits unless, within thirty days after
the date of notification or mailing, whichever is the earlier, of such
decision, further appeal is perfected pursuant to the provisions of this title
relating to review by the commissioner.

Sec. 10. RCW 50.32.100 and 1945 c
35 s 126 are each amended to read as follows:

In all
proceedings provided by this title prior to court review involving dispute of
an individual's initial determination((,)) or claim for ((waiting
period credit, or for)) benefits, the fees of all witnesses attending such
proceedings pursuant to subpoena shall be paid at the rate fixed by such
regulation as the commissioner shall prescribe and such fees and all costs of
such proceedings otherwise chargeable to such individual, except charges for
services rendered by counsel or other agent representing such individual, shall
be paid out of the unemployment compensation administration fund. In all other
respects and in all other proceedings under this title the rule in civil cases
as to costs and attorney fees shall apply: PROVIDED, That cost bills may be
served and filed and costs shall be taxed in accordance with such regulation as
the commissioner shall prescribe.

Sec. 11. RCW 50.32.110 and 1945 c
35 s 127 are each amended to read as follows:

No individual shall be
charged fees of any kind in any proceeding involving the individual's
application for initial determination((,)) or claim for ((waiting
period credit, or claim for)) benefits, under this title by the
commissioner or his representatives, or by an appeal tribunal, or any court, or
any officer thereof. Any individual in any such proceeding before the
commissioner or any appeal tribunal may be represented by counsel or other duly
authorized agent who shall neither charge nor receive a fee for such services
in excess of an amount found reasonable by the officer conducting such
proceeding.

Sec. 12. RCW 50.32.130 and 1973
1st ex.s. c 158 s 17 are each amended to read as follows:

No bond of any kind
shall be required of any individual seeking judicial review from a
commissioner's decision affecting such individual's application for initial
determination or claim for ((waiting period credit or for)) benefits.

No commissioner's decision
shall be stayed by a petition for judicial review unless the petitioning
employer shall first deposit an undertaking in an amount theretofore deemed by
the commissioner to be due, if any, from the petitioning employer, together
with interest thereon, if any, with the commissioner or in the registry of the
court: PROVIDED, HOWEVER, That this section shall not be deemed to authorize a
stay in the payment of benefits to an individual when such individual has been
held entitled thereto by a decision of the commissioner which decision either
affirms, reverses, or modifies a decision of an appeals tribunal.

Sec. 13. RCW 50.32.160 and 1988 c
202 s 48 are each amended to read as follows:

It shall be unlawful
for any attorney engaged in any appeal to the courts on behalf of an individual
involving the individual's application for initial determination((,)) or
claim for ((waiting period credit, or claim for)) benefits to charge or
receive any fee therein in excess of a reasonable fee to be fixed by the
superior court in respect to the services performed in connection with the
appeal taken thereto and to be fixed by the supreme court or the court of
appeals in the event of appellate review, and if the decision of the
commissioner shall be reversed or modified, such fee and the costs shall be
payable out of the unemployment compensation administration fund. In the
allowance of fees the court shall give consideration to the provisions of this
title in respect to fees pertaining to proceedings involving an individual's
application for initial determination((, claim for waiting period credit,))
or claim for benefits. In other respects the practice in civil cases shall
apply.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
14. RCW 50.20.020 (Waiting period credit
limitation) and 1949 c 214 s 10 & 1945 c 35 s 69 are each repealed.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
15. If any part of this act
is found to be in conflict with federal requirements that are a prescribed condition
to the allocation of federal funds to the state or the eligibility of employers
in this state for federal unemployment tax credits, the conflicting part of
this act is inoperative solely to the extent of the conflict, and the finding
or determination does not affect the operation of the remainder of this act.
Rules adopted under this act must meet federal requirements that are a
necessary condition to the receipt of federal funds by the state or the
granting of federal unemployment tax credits to employers in this state.

For the purposes of
this section, "federal requirements" does not mean federal
requirements that are a prescribed condition to the allocation of federal funds
to partially reimburse the state for the first week of extended benefits paid
under chapter 50.22 RCW.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
16. If any provision of this
act or its application to any person or circumstance is held invalid, the
remainder of the act or the application of the provision to other persons or
circumstances is not affected.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 17. This act is necessary for
the immediate preservation of the public peace, health, or safety, or support
of the state government and its existing public institutions, and takes effect
immediately.

---
END ---