BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF
WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec.
1. A new section is added
to chapter 43.41 RCW to read as follows:

The legislature finds
that public confidence in government is essential and that programs to improve
quality, efficiency, and effectiveness of public functions must be enhanced.
The legislature recognizes that all Washington state agencies must transform
the way they operate and deliver services to respond to severe, ongoing budget
shortfalls and declining revenues.

The intent of this act
is to establish an independent ongoing performance audit and yearly scoring
program in the office of financial management for the conduct of independent
performance audits and scoring for state government entities to ensure all are
world class in management, program outcomes, customer satisfaction, and
efficiency. The office of financial management, in consultation with the governor's
performance audit standards and scorecard commission shall audit and score
government entities in order to assist them in developing the management
expertise to continuously improve through continuous performance review and
management leadership.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
2. A new section is added
to chapter 43.41 RCW to read as follows:

(1) The director of
financial management shall establish a program and strategic plan for the
conduct of independent performance audits and yearly performance scoring of
state agencies and their programs and functions.

(2) The office of
financial management may contract with public or private entities that have
expertise in the conduct of public sector reviews to perform the audits and
performance scoring. Staff of the office of financial management or other
agency staff may also conduct the audits.

(3) In consultation
with the governor's performance audit standards and scorecard commission, the
office of financial management shall develop an implementation plan for a
phased-in audit schedule for a program and periodic audit and scoring of all
state government agencies, including higher education.

(4) The director of
financial management shall submit the results of the performance audits, performance
scoring, and any necessary implementing legislation to the governor and the
legislature by November 1st of each year, and shall release audit results and
performance scoring to the public and provide public recognition for
outstanding effort.

(5) In consultation
with the governor's performance audit standards and scorecard commission, the
office of financial management shall collect, disseminate, and share best
practices to all state agencies and institutions of higher education.

(6) The director of
financial management, in consultation with the governor's performance audit
standards and scorecard commission, shall contract for a performance audit of
the audit and performance scoring program described in this section by a
private professional by November 1, 2004.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
3. A new section is added
to chapter 43.41 RCW to read as follows:

The governor's
performance audit standards and scorecard commission is established.

(1) The commission
consists of seven citizen members appointed to staggered terms by the
governor. The citizen members shall demonstrate professional knowledge and
expertise in performance management, quality management, auditing, or a closely
related field.

(2) The office of
financial management shall provide the staff and resources necessary for
implementing sections 1 through 4 of this act.

(3) Except for initial
members, commission members shall serve for terms of four years, with the terms
expiring on June 30th on the fourth year of the term. Members may serve more
than one term.

(4) Members of the
commission shall be compensated in accordance with RCW 43.03.220 and reimbursed
for travel expenses under RCW 43.03.050 and 43.03.060.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
4. A new section is added
to chapter 43.41 RCW to read as follows:

The governor's
performance audit standards and scorecard commission shall:

(1) Assist in the
development of criteria for performance audits and a scoring system for grading
overall agency performance. In developing criteria and a scoring system, the
commission shall consult with and seek input from elected officials and
professionals with a background in performance management. Audit criteria
shall be distributed at least six weeks before an audit. The governor's
performance audit standards and scorecard commission shall consider already
developed best practices and audit criteria used by government or nongovernment
organizations;

(2) Advise the governor
and the director of financial management on the conduct of the performance
audit program;

(3) Develop
recommendations for the director of financial management on the subjects of
performance audits and the audit schedule; and

(4) Evaluate audit
findings and performance scoring in order to identify opportunities to develop
government partnerships and eliminate program duplications and redundancies
resulting in increased quality, effectiveness, and efficiency of state
agencies.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
5. A new section is added
to chapter 43.41 RCW to read as follows:

For purposes of
sections 1 through 5 of this act, "performance audit" means an
objective systematic assessment, survey, or directed self-assessment of state
agencies, programs, functions, or activities to provide for public
accountability. Initial performance audits and performance scoring shall
include, but are not limited to: (1) Quality and process management practices;
(2) independent and internal audit functions; (3) internal and external
customer satisfaction; (4) program effectiveness; (5) fiscal productivity and
efficiency; (6) regulatory and procedural compliance; and (7) any other areas
as appropriate.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
6. (1) A pilot performance
audit of the department of agriculture is authorized to be performed in the
2001-2003 biennium by the state auditor. In conducting the performance audit,
the office of the state auditor shall work in cooperation with the office of
financial management and state agency personnel. The state auditor shall use
the guidelines for a performance audit contained in RCW 44.28.075.

(2) The performance
audit of the department of agriculture by the state auditor shall be completed
by December 31, 2002, and shall be presented to the appropriate policy and
fiscal committees of the legislature. The state auditor shall include in the
report to the legislature information on the staffing, time, and cost used by
the office of the state auditor to complete the performance audit of the
department of agriculture. This section shall expire June 30, 2003.

Sec. 7. RCW 43.88.160 and 1998 c
135 s 1 are each amended to read as follows:

This section sets forth
the major fiscal duties and responsibilities of officers and agencies of the
executive branch. The regulations issued by the governor pursuant to this
chapter shall provide for a comprehensive, orderly basis for fiscal management
and control, including efficient accounting and reporting therefor, for the
executive branch of the state government and may include, in addition, such
requirements as will generally promote more efficient public management in the
state.

(1) Governor; director
of financial management. The governor, through the director of financial
management, shall devise and supervise a modern and complete accounting system
for each agency to the end that all revenues, expenditures, receipts,
disbursements, resources, and obligations of the state shall be properly and
systematically accounted for. The accounting system shall include the
development of accurate, timely records and reports of all financial affairs of
the state. The system shall also provide for central accounts in the office of
financial management at the level of detail deemed necessary by the director to
perform central financial management. The director of financial management
shall adopt and periodically update an accounting procedures manual. Any
agency maintaining its own accounting and reporting system shall comply with
the updated accounting procedures manual and the rules of the director adopted
under this chapter. An agency may receive a waiver from complying with this
requirement if the waiver is approved by the director. Waivers expire at the
end of the fiscal biennium for which they are granted. The director shall
forward notice of waivers granted to the appropriate legislative fiscal
committees. The director of financial management may require such financial,
statistical, and other reports as the director deems necessary from all
agencies covering any period.

(2) Except as provided
in chapter 43.88C RCW, the director of financial management is responsible for
quarterly reporting of primary operating budget drivers such as applicable workloads,
caseload estimates, and appropriate unit cost data. These reports shall be
transmitted to the legislative fiscal committees or by electronic means to the
legislative evaluation and accountability program committee. Quarterly reports
shall include actual monthly data and the variance between actual and estimated
data to date. The reports shall also include estimates of these items for the
remainder of the budget period.

(3) The director of
financial management shall report at least annually to the appropriate
legislative committees regarding the status of all appropriated capital
projects, including transportation projects, showing significant cost overruns
or underruns. If funds are shifted from one project to another, the office of
financial management shall also reflect this in the annual variance report.
Once a project is complete, the report shall provide a final summary showing
estimated start and completion dates of each project phase compared to actual
dates, estimated costs of each project phase compared to actual costs, and
whether or not there are any outstanding liabilities or unsettled claims at the
time of completion.

(4) In addition, the
director of financial management, as agent of the governor, shall:

(a) Develop and
maintain a system of internal controls and internal audits comprising methods
and procedures to be adopted by each agency that will safeguard its assets,
check the accuracy and reliability of its accounting data, promote operational
efficiency, and encourage adherence to prescribed managerial policies for
accounting and financial controls. The system developed by the director shall
include criteria for determining the scope and comprehensiveness of internal
controls required by classes of agencies, depending on the level of resources
at risk.

Each agency head or
authorized designee shall be assigned the responsibility and authority for
establishing and maintaining internal audits following the standards of
internal auditing of the institute of internal auditors;

(b) Make surveys and
analyses of agencies with the object of determining better methods and
increased effectiveness in the use of manpower and materials; and the director
shall authorize expenditures for employee training to the end that the state
may benefit from training facilities made available to state employees;

(c) Establish policies
for allowing the contracting of child care services;

(d) Report to the
governor with regard to duplication of effort or lack of coordination among
agencies;

(e) Review any pay and
classification plans, and changes thereunder, developed by any agency for their
fiscal impact: PROVIDED, That none of the provisions of this subsection shall
affect merit systems of personnel management now existing or hereafter
established by statute relating to the fixing of qualifications requirements
for recruitment, appointment, or promotion of employees of any agency. The
director shall advise and confer with agencies including appropriate standing
committees of the legislature as may be designated by the speaker of the house
and the president of the senate regarding the fiscal impact of such plans and
may amend or alter said plans, except that for the following agencies no
amendment or alteration of said plans may be made without the approval of the
agency concerned: Agencies headed by elective officials;

(f) Fix the number and
classes of positions or authorized man years of employment for each agency and
during the fiscal period amend the determinations previously fixed by the
director except that the director shall not be empowered to fix said number or
said classes for the following: Agencies headed by elective officials;

(g) Adopt rules to
effectuate provisions contained in (a) through (f) of this subsection.

(5) The treasurer shall:

(a) Receive, keep, and
disburse all public funds of the state not expressly required by law to be
received, kept, and disbursed by some other persons: PROVIDED, That this
subsection shall not apply to those public funds of the institutions of higher
learning which are not subject to appropriation;

(b) Receive, disburse,
or transfer public funds under the treasurer's supervision or custody;

(c) Keep a correct and
current account of all moneys received and disbursed by the treasurer,
classified by fund or account;

(d) Coordinate
agencies' acceptance and use of credit cards and other payment methods, if the
agencies have received authorization under RCW 43.41.180;

(e) Perform such other
duties as may be required by law or by regulations issued pursuant to this law.

It shall be unlawful
for the treasurer to disburse public funds in the treasury except upon forms or
by alternative means duly prescribed by the director of financial management.
These forms or alternative means shall provide for authentication and
certification by the agency head or the agency head's designee that the
services have been rendered or the materials have been furnished; or, in the
case of loans or grants, that the loans or grants are authorized by law; or, in
the case of payments for periodic maintenance services to be performed on state
owned equipment, that a written contract for such periodic maintenance services
is currently in effect and copies thereof are on file with the office of
financial management; and the treasurer shall not be liable under the
treasurer's surety bond for erroneous or improper payments so made. When
services are lawfully paid for in advance of full performance by any private
individual or business entity other than as provided for by RCW 42.24.035, such
individual or entity other than central stores rendering such services shall
make a cash deposit or furnish surety bond coverage to the state as shall be
fixed in an amount by law, or if not fixed by law, then in such amounts as
shall be fixed by the director of the department of general administration but
in no case shall such required cash deposit or surety bond be less than an
amount which will fully indemnify the state against any and all losses on
account of breach of promise to fully perform such services. No payments shall
be made in advance for any equipment maintenance services to be performed more
than three months after such payment. Any such bond so furnished shall be
conditioned that the person, firm or corporation receiving the advance payment
will apply it toward performance of the contract. The responsibility for
recovery of erroneous or improper payments made under this section shall lie
with the agency head or the agency head's designee in accordance with
regulations issued pursuant to this chapter. Nothing in this section shall be
construed to permit a public body to advance funds to a private service
provider pursuant to a grant or loan before services have been rendered or
material furnished.

(6) The state auditor
shall:

(a) Report to the
legislature the results of current post audits that have been made of the
financial transactions of each agency; to this end the auditor may, in the
auditor's discretion, examine the books and accounts of any agency, official,
or employee charged with the receipt, custody, or safekeeping of public funds.
Where feasible in conducting examinations, the auditor shall utilize data and
findings from the internal control system prescribed by the office of financial
management. The current post audit of each agency may include a section on
recommendations to the legislature as provided in (c) of this subsection.

(b) Give information to
the legislature, whenever required, upon any subject relating to the financial
affairs of the state.

(c) Make the auditor's
official report on or before the thirty-first of December which precedes the
meeting of the legislature. The report shall be for the last complete fiscal
period and shall include determinations as to whether agencies, in making
expenditures, complied with the laws of this state. The state auditor is
authorized to perform or participate in performance verifications and
performance audits as expressly authorized by the legislature in the omnibus
biennial appropriations acts or in the performance audit work plan approved by
the joint legislative audit and review committee. The state auditor, upon
completing an audit for legal and financial compliance under chapter 43.09 RCW
or a performance verification, may report to the joint legislative audit and
review committee or other appropriate committees of the legislature, in a
manner prescribed by the joint legislative audit and review committee, on facts
relating to the management or performance of governmental programs where such
facts are discovered incidental to the legal and financial audit or performance
verification. The auditor may make such a report to a legislative committee
only if the auditor has determined that the agency has been given an
opportunity and has failed to resolve the management or performance issues
raised by the auditor. If the auditor makes a report to a legislative
committee, the agency may submit to the committee a response to the report.
This subsection (6) shall not be construed to authorize the auditor to allocate
other than de minimis resources to performance audits except as expressly
authorized in section 6 of this act, in the appropriations acts,
or in the performance audit work plan. The results of a performance audit
conducted by the state auditor that has been requested by the joint legislative
audit and review committee must only be transmitted to the joint legislative
audit and review committee.

(d) Be empowered to
take exception to specific expenditures that have been incurred by any agency
or to take exception to other practices related in any way to the agency's
financial transactions and to cause such exceptions to be made a matter of
public record, including disclosure to the agency concerned and to the director
of financial management. It shall be the duty of the director of financial
management to cause corrective action to be taken within six months, such
action to include, as appropriate, the withholding of funds as provided in RCW
43.88.110. The director of financial management shall annually report by
December 31st the status of audit resolution to the appropriate committees of
the legislature, the state auditor, and the attorney general. The director of
financial management shall include in the audit resolution report actions taken
as a result of an audit including, but not limited to, types of personnel
actions, costs and types of litigation, and value of recouped goods or
services.

(e) Promptly report any
irregularities to the attorney general.

(f) Investigate
improper governmental activity under chapter 42.40 RCW.

(7) The joint
legislative audit and review committee may:

(a) Make post audits of
the financial transactions of any agency and management surveys and program
reviews as provided for in chapter 44.28 RCW as well as performance audits and
program evaluations. To this end the joint committee may in its discretion
examine the books, accounts, and other records of any agency, official, or
employee.

(b) Give information to
the legislature or any legislative committee whenever required upon any subject
relating to the performance and management of state agencies.

(c) Make a report to
the legislature which shall include at least the following:

(i) Determinations as
to the extent to which agencies in making expenditures have complied with the
will of the legislature and in this connection, may take exception to specific
expenditures or financial practices of any agencies; and

(ii) Such plans as it
deems expedient for the support of the state's credit, for lessening
expenditures, for promoting frugality and economy in agency affairs, and
generally for an improved level of fiscal management.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 8. If specific funding for
the purposes of this act, referencing this act by bill or chapter number, is
not provided by June 30, 2002, in the omnibus appropriations act, this act is
null and void.

---
END ---