BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF
WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec.
1. Referendum petitions for
annexations must be signed by a requisite number of qualified electors in order
to be placed on the ballot. Unlike registered voters, there is no record of
qualified electors within a city or town. Consequently there is no way of
determining the validity of individual signatures or whether the requisite
number of qualified electors have signed a petition.

It is the legislature's
intent to replace the "qualified electors" with "registered
voters."

Sec. 2. RCW 35A.14.299 and 1967
ex.s. c 119 s 35A.14.299 are each amended to read as follows:

Such annexation
ordinance as provided for in RCW 35A.14.297 shall be subject to referendum for
forty-five days after the passage thereof. Upon the filing of a timely and
sufficient referendum petition with the legislative body, signed by ((qualified
electors)) registered voters in number equal to not less than ten
percent of the votes cast in the last general state election in the area to be
annexed, the question of annexation shall be submitted to the voters of such
area in a general election if one is to be held within ninety days or at a
special election called for that purpose not less than forty-five days nor more
than ninety days after the filing of the referendum petition. Notice of such
election shall be given as provided in RCW 35A.14.070 ((and the election
shall be conducted as provided in RCW 35A.14.060)). The annexation shall
be deemed approved by the voters unless a majority of the votes cast on the
proposition are in opposition thereto.

After the
expiration of the forty-fifth day from but excluding the date of passage of the
annexation ordinance, if no timely and sufficient referendum petition has been
filed, the area annexed shall become a part of the code city upon the date
fixed in the ordinance of annexation. From and after such date, if the
ordinance so provided, property in the annexed area shall be subject to the
proposed zoning regulation prepared and filed for such area as provided in RCW
35A.14.330 and 35A.14.340. If the ordinance so provided, all property within
the area annexed shall be assessed and taxed at the same rate and on the same
basis as the property of such annexing code city is assessed and taxed to pay
for any then outstanding indebtedness of such city contracted prior to, or
existing at, the date of annexation.

Sec. 3. RCW 35A.14.020 and 1989
c 351 s 4 are each amended to read as follows:

When a petition is
sufficient under the rules set forth in RCW 35A.01.040, calling for an election
to vote upon the annexation of unincorporated territory contiguous to a code
city, describing the boundaries of the area proposed to be annexed, stating the
number of voters therein as nearly as may be, and signed by ((qualified
electors)) registered voters resident in such territory equal in
number to ten percent of the votes cast at the last state general election
therein, it shall be filed with the auditor of the county in which all, or the
greatest portion, of the territory is located, and a copy of the petition shall
be filed with the legislative body of the code city. If the territory is
located in more than a single county, the auditor of the county with whom the
petition is filed shall act as the lead auditor and transmit a copy of the
petition to the auditor of each other county within which a portion of the
territory is located. The auditor or auditors shall examine the petition, and
the auditor or lead auditor shall certify the sufficiency of the petition to
the legislative authority of the code city.

If the
signatures on the petition are certified as containing sufficient valid
signatures, the city legislative authority shall, by resolution entered within
sixty days thereafter, notify the petitioners, either by mail or by publication
in the same manner notice of hearing is required by RCW 35A.14.040 to be
published, of its approval or rejection of the proposed action. In approving
the proposed action, the legislative body may require that there also be
submitted to the electorate of the territory to be annexed, a proposition that
all property within the area to be annexed shall, upon annexation, be assessed
and taxed at the same rate and on the same basis as the property of such
annexing city is assessed and taxed to pay for all or any portion of the
then-outstanding indebtedness of the city to which said area is annexed, which
indebtedness has been approved by the voters, contracted for, or incurred prior
to, or existing at, the date of annexation. Only after the legislative body
has completed preparation and filing of a proposed zoning regulation for the
area to be annexed as provided for in RCW 35A.14.330 and 35A.14.340, the
legislative body in approving the proposed action, may require that the
proposed zoning regulation be simultaneously adopted upon the approval of
annexation by the electorate of the area to be annexed. The approval of the
legislative body shall be a condition precedent to further proceedings upon the
petition. The costs of conducting the election called for in the petition
shall be a charge against the city concerned. The proposition or questions
provided for in this section may be submitted to the voter either separately or
as a single proposition.

---
END ---