BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF
WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec.
1. The legislature finds,
declares, and determines that limited changes in the law are necessary and
appropriate concerning actions claiming damages, indemnity, or contribution in
connection with alleged construction defects. It is the intent of the
legislature that this chapter apply to these types of civil actions while
preserving adequate rights and remedies for property owners who bring and
maintain such actions.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
2. Unless the context
clearly requires otherwise, the definitions in this section apply throughout
this chapter.

(1) "Action"
means any civil lawsuit or action in contract or tort for damages or indemnity
brought against a construction professional to assert a claim, whether by
complaint, counterclaim, or cross-claim, for damage or the loss of use of real
or personal property caused by a defect in the construction of a residence or
in the substantial remodel of a residence. "Action" does not include
any civil action in tort alleging personal injury or wrongful death to a person
or persons resulting from a construction defect.

(2)
"Association" means an association, master association, or
subassociation as defined and provided for in RCW 64.34.020(4), 64.34.276,
64.34.278, and 64.38.010(1).

(3)
"Claimant" means a homeowner or association who asserts a claim
against a construction professional concerning a defect in the construction of
a residence or in the substantial remodel of a residence.

(4) "Construction
professional" means an architect, builder, builder vendor, contractor,
subcontractor, engineer, or inspector, including, but not limited to, a dealer
as defined in RCW 64.34.020(12) and a declarant as defined in RCW 64.34.020(13),
performing or furnishing the design, supervision, inspection, construction, or
observation of the construction of any improvement to real property, whether
operating as a sole proprietor, partnership, corporation, or other business
entity.

(5)
"Homeowner" means: (a) Any person, company, firm, partnership,
corporation, or association who contracts with a construction professional for
the construction, sale, or construction and sale of a residence; and (b) an
"association" as defined in this section. "Homeowner"
includes, but is not limited to, a subsequent purchaser of a residence from any
homeowner.

(6)
"Residence" means a single-family house, duplex, triplex, quadraplex,
or a unit in a multiunit residential structure in which title to each
individual unit is transferred to the owner under a condominium or cooperative
system, and shall include common elements as defined in RCW 64.34.020(6) and
common areas as defined in RCW 64.38.010(4).

(7) "Serve"
or "service" means personal service or delivery by certified mail to
the last known address of the addressee.

(8) "Substantial
remodel" means a remodel of a residence, for which the total cost exceeds
one-half of the assessed value of the residence for property tax purposes at
the time the contract for the remodel work was made.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
3. (1) In every construction
defect action brought against a construction professional, the claimant shall,
no later than forty-five days before filing an action, serve written notice of
claim on the construction professional, by registered mail or personal
service. The notice of claim shall state that the claimant asserts a
construction defect claim against the construction professional and shall
describe the claim in reasonable detail sufficient to determine the general
nature of the defect and the problems resulting from the defect.

(2) Within twenty-one
days after service of the notice of claim, the construction professional shall
serve a written response on the claimant by registered mail or personal
service. The written response shall:

(a) Propose to inspect
the residence that is the subject of the claim and to complete the inspection
within a specified time frame. The proposal shall include the statement that
the construction professional shall, based on the inspection, offer to remedy
the defect, compromise by payment, or dispute the claim;

(b) Offer to compromise
and settle the claim by monetary payment without inspection. A construction
professional's offer under this subsection (2)(b) to compromise and settle a
homeowner's claim may include, but is not limited to, an express offer to purchase
the claimant's residence that is the subject of the claim, and to pay the
claimant's reasonable relocation costs; or

(c) State that the
construction professional disputes the claim and will neither remedy the
construction defect nor compromise and settle the claim.

(3)(a) If the
construction professional disputes the claim or does not respond to the
claimant's notice of claim within the time stated in subsection (2) of this
section, the claimant may bring an action against the construction professional
for the claim described in the notice of claim without further notice.

(b) If the claimant
rejects the inspection proposal or the settlement offer made by the
construction professional pursuant to subsection (2) of this section, the
claimant shall serve written notice of the claimant's rejection on the
construction professional. After service of the rejection, the claimant may
bring an action against the construction professional for the construction
defect claim described in the notice of claim. If the construction
professional has not received from the claimant, within thirty days after the
claimant's receipt of the construction professional's response, either an
acceptance or rejection of the inspection proposal or settlement offer, then at
anytime thereafter the construction professional may terminate the proposal or
offer by written notice to the claimant, and the claimant may thereafter bring
an action against the construction professional for the construction defect
claim described in the notice of claim.

(4)(a) If the claimant
elects to allow the construction professional to inspect in accordance with the
construction professional's proposal pursuant to subsection (2)(a) of this
section, the claimant shall provide the construction professional and its
contractors or other agents reasonable access to the claimant's residence
during normal working hours to inspect the premises and the claimed defect.

(b) Within fourteen
days following completion of the inspection, the construction professional shall
serve on the claimant:

(i) A written offer to
remedy the construction defect at no cost to the claimant, including a
description of the additional construction that the construction professional
has determined from the inspection will be necessary to remedy the defect
described in the claim, and a timetable for the completion of such
construction;

(ii) A written offer to
compromise and settle the claim by monetary payment pursuant to subsection
(2)(b) of this section; or

(iii) A written
statement that the construction professional will not proceed further to remedy
the defect.

(c) If the construction
professional does not proceed further to remedy the construction defect within
the agreed timetable, or if the construction professional fails to comply with
the provisions of (b) of this subsection, the claimant may bring an action
against the construction professional for the claim described in the notice of
claim without further notice.

(d) If the claimant
rejects the offer made by the construction professional pursuant to (b)(i) or
(ii) of this subsection to either remedy the construction defect or to
compromise and settle the claim by monetary payment, the claimant shall serve
written notice of the claimant's rejection on the construction professional.
After service of the rejection notice, the claimant may, in accordance with
this chapter, bring an action against the construction professional for the
construction defect claim described in the notice of claim. If the
construction professional has not received from the claimant, within thirty
days after the claimant's receipt of the construction professional's response,
either an acceptance or rejection of the offer made pursuant to (b)(i) or (ii)
of this subsection, then at anytime thereafter the construction professional
may terminate the proposal or offer by written notice to the claimant, and the
claimant may thereafter bring an action against the construction professional
for the construction defect claim described in the notice of claim.

(5)(a) Any claimant
accepting the offer of a construction professional to remedy the construction
defect pursuant to subsection (4)(b)(i) of this section shall do so by serving
the construction professional with a written notice of acceptance within a
reasonable time period after receipt of the offer, and no later than thirty
days after receipt of the offer. The claimant shall provide the construction
professional and its contractors or other agents reasonable access to the
claimant's residence during normal working hours to perform and complete the
construction by the timetable stated in the offer.

(b) The claimant and
construction professional may, by written mutual agreement, alter the extent of
construction or the timetable for completion of construction stated in the
offer, including, but not limited to, repair of additional defects.

(6) Any action
commenced by a claimant prior to compliance with the requirements of this
section shall be subject to dismissal without prejudice, and may not be
recommenced until the claimant has complied with the requirements of this
section.

(7) Nothing in this
section may be construed to prevent a claimant from commencing an action on the
construction defect claim described in the notice of claim if:

(a) The construction
professional fails to perform the construction agreed upon, fails to remedy the
defect, or fails to perform by the timetable agreed upon pursuant to subsection
(2)(a) or (5) of this section; or

(b) Notwithstanding the
completion of the construction agreed upon, the claimant later discovers latent
construction defects that the claimant attributes to the construction
professional, but that were not discoverable by a reasonable person at the time
of such completion. Any claimant who intends to bring an action for such
latent construction defects may do so only after complying with the
requirements of this section.

(8) Prior to commencing
any action alleging a construction defect, or after the dismissal of any action
without prejudice pursuant to subsection (6) of this section, the claimant may
amend the notice of claim to include construction defects discovered after the
service of the original notice of claim but not discoverable by a reasonable
person at the time of the original claim, and must otherwise comply with the
requirements of this section for the additional claims. The service of an
amended notice of claim shall relate back to the original notice of claim for
purposes of tolling the statute of limitations. Claims for defects discovered
after the commencement or recommencement of an action may be added to such
action only after complying with the requirements of this section with respect
to such subsequently discovered defects.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
4. (1) In every action brought
against a construction professional, the claimant, including a construction
professional asserting a claim against another construction professional, shall
file with the court and serve on the defendant a list of known construction
defects in accordance with this section.

(2) The list of known
construction defects shall contain a description of the construction that the
claimant alleges to be defective. The list of known construction defects shall
be filed with the court and served on the defendant within thirty days after
the commencement of the action or within such longer period as the court in its
discretion may allow.

(3) The list of known
construction defects may be amended by the claimant to identify additional
construction defects as they become known to the claimant.

(4) The list of known
construction defects must specify, to the extent known to the claimant, the
construction professional responsible for each alleged defect identified by the
claimant.

(5) If a subcontractor
or supplier is added as a party to an action under this section, the claimant
making the claim against such subcontractor or supplier shall serve on the
defendant the list of construction defects in accordance with this section
within thirty days after service of the complaint against the subcontractor or
supplier or within such period as the court in its discretion may allow.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
5. (1)(a) In the event the
board of directors, pursuant to RCW 64.34.304(1)(d) or 64.38.020(4), institutes
an action asserting defects in the construction of two or more residences,
common elements, or common areas, this section shall apply. For purposes of this
section, "action" has the same meaning as set forth in section 2 of
this act.

(b) The board of
directors shall substantially comply with the provisions of this section.

(2)(a) Prior to the
service of the summons and complaint on any defendant with respect to an action
governed by this section, the board of directors shall mail or deliver written
notice of the commencement or anticipated commencement of such action to each
homeowner at the last known address described in the association's records.

(b) The notice required
by (a) of this subsection shall state a general description of the following:

(i) The nature of the
action and the relief sought; and

(ii) The expenses and
fees that the board of directors anticipates will be incurred in prosecuting
the action.

(3) Nothing in this
section may be construed to:

(a) Require the
disclosure in the notice or the disclosure to a unit owner of attorney-client
communications or other privileged communications;

(b) Permit the notice
to serve as a basis for any person to assert the waiver of any applicable
privilege or right of confidentiality resulting from, or to claim immunity in
connection with, the disclosure of information in the notice; or

(c) Limit or impair the
authority of the board of directors to contract for legal services, or limit or
impair the ability to enforce such a contract for legal services.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
6. (1) The construction
professional shall provide notice to each homeowner upon entering into a contract
for sale, construction, or substantial remodel of a residence, for which the
cost of the remodel exceeds half of the appraised value of the existing
residence, of the construction professional's right to offer to cure
construction defects before a homeowner may commence litigation against the
construction professional. Such notice shall be conspicuous and may be
included as part of the underlying contract signed by the homeowner. In the
sale of a condominium unit, the requirement for delivery of such notice shall
be deemed satisfied if contained in a public offering statement delivered in
accordance with chapter 64.34 RCW.

(2) The notice required
by this subsection shall be in substantially the following form:

CHAPTER
64.-- RCW (sections 1 through 7 of this act) CONTAINS IMPORTANT REQUIREMENTS
YOU MUST FOLLOW BEFORE YOU MAY FILE A LAWSUIT FOR DEFECTIVE CONSTRUCTION
AGAINST THE SELLER OR BUILDER OF YOUR HOME. FORTY-FIVE DAYS BEFORE YOU FILE
YOUR LAWSUIT, YOU MUST DELIVER TO THE SELLER OR BUILDER A WRITTEN NOTICE OF ANY
CONSTRUCTION CONDITIONS YOU ALLEGE ARE DEFECTIVE AND PROVIDE YOUR SELLER OR
BUILDER THE OPPORTUNITY TO MAKE AN OFFER TO REPAIR OR PAY FOR THE DEFECTS. YOU
ARE NOT OBLIGATED TO ACCEPT ANY OFFER MADE BY THE BUILDER OR SELLER. THERE ARE
STRICT DEADLINES AND PROCEDURES UNDER STATE LAW, AND FAILURE TO FOLLOW THEM MAY
AFFECT YOUR ABILITY TO FILE A LAWSUIT.

(3) This chapter shall
not preclude or bar any action if notice is not given to the homeowner as
required by this section.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
7. Nothing in this chapter
shall be construed to hinder or otherwise affect the employment, agency, or
contractual relationship between and among homeowners and construction
professionals during the process of construction or remodeling and does not
preclude the termination of those relationships as allowed under current law.
Nothing in this chapter shall negate or otherwise restrict a construction
professional's right to access or inspection provided by law, covenant,
easement, or contract.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
8. A new section is added
to chapter 4.16 RCW to read as follows:

If a written notice of
claim is served under section 3 of this act within the time prescribed for the
filing of an action under this chapter, all statutes of limitation and statutes
of repose for construction-related claims are tolled until sixty days after the
period of time during which the filing of an action is barred under section 3
of this act.

Sec. 9. RCW 64.34.410 and 1997 c
400 s 1 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) A public offering
statement shall contain the following information:

(a) The name and
address of the condominium;

(b) The name and
address of the declarant;

(c) The name and
address of the management company, if any;

(d) The relationship of
the management company to the declarant, if any;

(e) A list of up to the
five most recent condominium projects completed by the declarant or an
affiliate of the declarant within the past five years, including the names of
the condominiums, their addresses, and the number of existing units in each.
For the purpose of this section, a condominium is "completed" when
any one unit therein has been rented or sold;

(f) The nature of the
interest being offered for sale;

(g) A brief description
of the permitted uses and use restrictions pertaining to the units and the
common elements;

(h) A brief description
of the restrictions, if any, on the renting or leasing of units by the
declarant or other unit owners, together with the rights, if any, of the
declarant to rent or lease at least a majority of units;

(i) The number of
existing units in the condominium and the maximum number of units that may be
added to the condominium;

(j) A list of the
principal common amenities in the condominium which materially affect the value
of the condominium and those that will or may be added to the condominium;

(k) A list of the
limited common elements assigned to the units being offered for sale;

(l) The identification
of any real property not in the condominium, the owner of which has access to
any of the common elements, and a description of the terms of such access;

(m) The identification
of any real property not in the condominium to which unit owners have access
and a description of the terms of such access;

(n) The status of
construction of the units and common elements, including estimated dates of
completion if not completed;

(o) The estimated
current common expense liability for the units being offered;

(p) An estimate of any
payment with respect to the common expense liability for the units being
offered which will be due at closing;

(q) The estimated
current amount and purpose of any fees not included in the common expenses and
charged by the declarant or the association for the use of any of the common
elements;

(r) Any assessments
which have been agreed to or are known to the declarant and which, if not paid,
may constitute a lien against any units or common elements in favor of any
governmental agency;

(s) The identification
of any parts of the condominium, other than the units, which any individual
owner will have the responsibility for maintaining;

(t) If the condominium
involves a conversion condominium, the information required by RCW 64.34.415;

(u) Whether timesharing
is restricted or prohibited, and if restricted, a general description of such
restrictions;

(v) A list of all
development rights reserved to the declarant and all special declarant rights
reserved to the declarant, together with the dates such rights must terminate,
and a copy of or reference by recording number to any recorded transfer of a
special declarant right;

(w) A description of
any material differences in terms of furnishings, fixtures, finishes, and
equipment between any model unit available to the purchaser at the time the
agreement for sale is executed and the unit being offered;

(x) Any liens on real
property to be conveyed to the association required to be disclosed pursuant to
RCW 64.34.435(2)(b);

(y) A list of any
physical hazards known to the declarant which particularly affect the
condominium or the immediate vicinity in which the condominium is located and
which are not readily ascertainable by the purchaser;

(z) A brief description
of any construction warranties to be provided to the purchaser;

(aa) Any building code
violation citations received by the declarant in connection with the
condominium which have not been corrected;

(bb) A statement of any
unsatisfied judgments or pending suits against the association, a statement of
the status of any pending suits material to the condominium of which the
declarant has actual knowledge, and a statement of any litigation brought by an
owners' association, unit owner, or governmental entity in which the declarant
or any affiliate of the declarant has been a defendant, arising out of the
construction, sale, or administration of any condominium within the previous
five years, together with the results thereof, if known;

(cc) Any rights of
first refusal to lease or purchase any unit or any of the common elements;

(dd) The extent to
which the insurance provided by the association covers furnishings, fixtures,
and equipment located in the unit;

(ee) A notice which
describes a purchaser's right to cancel the purchase agreement or extend the
closing under RCW 64.34.420, including applicable time frames and procedures;

(ff) Any reports or
statements required by RCW 64.34.415 or 64.34.440(6)(a). RCW 64.34.415 shall
apply to the public offering statement of a condominium in connection with
which a final certificate of occupancy was issued more than sixty calendar
months prior to the preparation of the public offering statement whether or not
the condominium is a conversion condominium as defined in RCW 64.34.020(10);

(gg) A list of the
documents which the prospective purchaser is entitled to receive from the
declarant before the rescission period commences;

(hh) A notice which
states: A purchaser may not rely on any representation or express warranty
unless it is contained in the public offering statement or made in writing
signed by the declarant or by any person identified in the public offering
statement as the declarant's agent;

(ii) A notice which
states: This public offering statement is only a summary of some of the
significant aspects of purchasing a unit in this condominium and the
condominium documents are complex, contain other important information, and
create binding legal obligations. You should consider seeking the assistance
of legal counsel;

(jj) Any other
information and cross-references which the declarant believes will be helpful
in describing the condominium to the recipients of the public offering
statement, all of which may be included or not included at the option of the
declarant; ((and))

(kk) A notice that
addresses compliance or noncompliance with the housing for older persons act of
1995, P.L. 104-76, as enacted on December 28, 1995; and

(ll) A notice that
is substantially in the form required by section 6 of this act.

(2) The public offering
statement shall include copies of each of the following documents: The
declaration, the survey map and plans, the articles of incorporation of the
association, bylaws of the association, rules and regulations, if any, current
or proposed budget for the association, and the balance sheet of the
association current within ninety days if assessments have been collected for
ninety days or more.

If any of the foregoing
documents listed in this subsection are not available because they have not
been executed, adopted, or recorded, drafts of such documents shall be provided
with the public offering statement, and, before closing the sale of a unit, the
purchaser shall be given copies of any material changes between the draft of
the proposed documents and the final documents.

(3) The disclosures
required by subsection (1)(g), (k), (s), (u), (v), and (cc) of this section
shall also contain a reference to specific sections in the condominium
documents which further explain the information disclosed.

(4) The disclosures
required by subsection (1)(ee), (hh), ((and)) (ii), and (ll) of
this section shall be located at the top of the first page of the public
offering statement and be typed or printed in ten-point bold face type size.

(5) A declarant shall
promptly amend the public offering statement to reflect any material change in
the information required by this section.

Sec. 10. RCW 64.34.452 and 1990 c
166 s 14 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) A judicial
proceeding for breach of any obligations arising under RCW 64.34.443 and
64.34.445 must be commenced within four years after the cause of action
accrues: PROVIDED, That the period for commencing an action for a breach
accruing pursuant to subsection (2)(b) of this section shall not expire prior
to one year after termination of the period of declarant control, if any, under
RCW 64.34.308(4). Such period may not be reduced by either oral or written
agreement.

(2) Subject to
subsection (3) of this section, a cause of action or breach of warranty of
quality, regardless of the purchaser's lack of knowledge of the breach,
accrues:

(a) As to a unit, the
date the purchaser to whom the warranty is first made enters into possession if
a possessory interest was conveyed or the date of acceptance of the instrument
of conveyance if a nonpossessory interest was conveyed; and

(b) As to each common
element, at the latest of (i) the date the first unit in the condominium was
conveyed to a bona fide purchaser, (ii) the date the common element was
completed, or (iii) the date the common element was added to the condominium.

(3) If a warranty of
quality explicitly extends to future performance or duration of any improvement
or component of the condominium, the cause of action accrues at the time the
breach is discovered or at the end of the period for which the warranty
explicitly extends, whichever is earlier.

(4) If a written
notice of claim is served under section 3 of this act within the time
prescribed for the filing of an action under this chapter, the statutes of
limitation in this chapter and any applicable statutes of repose for
construction-related claims are tolled until sixty days after the period of
time during which the filing of an action is barred under section 3 of this
act.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 11. Sections 1 through 7 of
this act constitute a new chapter in Title 64 RCW.

---
END ---