BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF
WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec.
1. A new section is added
to chapter 70.94 RCW to read as follows:

The legislature finds
that the use of motor vehicles has significant impacts on the environment,
public health, and the economy of the state of Washington. Motor vehicle
emissions account for more than half of all air pollutants and almost sixty
percent of total carbon dioxide emissions in Washington. Motor vehicles also
account for the largest percentage of oil consumption in the United States.
The legislature finds it is important to begin addressing the negative impacts
of gasoline and diesel fuels. Addressing motor vehicle emissions is further
needed because of the expected increases in population and vehicle miles traveled,
which threaten to erode air quality gains made over the last decade. To make
net progress in improving air quality, reducing the threat of climate change,
protecting public health and the environment, and improving energy security,
the legislature finds it is necessary to encourage the use of clean alternative
fuel vehicles.

Sec. 2. RCW 70.94.030 and 1993 c
252 s 2 are each amended to read as follows:

Unless a different
meaning is plainly required by the context, the following words and phrases as
hereinafter used in this chapter shall have the following meanings:

(1) "Air
contaminant" means dust, fumes, mist, smoke, other particulate matter,
vapor, gas, odorous substance, or any combination thereof.

(2) "Air pollution"
is presence in the outdoor atmosphere of one or more air contaminants in
sufficient quantities and of such characteristics and duration as is, or is
likely to be, injurious to human health, plant or animal life, or property, or
which unreasonably interfere with enjoyment of life and property. For the
purpose of this chapter, air pollution shall not include air contaminants
emitted in compliance with chapter 17.21 RCW.

(3) "Air quality
standard" means an established concentration, exposure time, and frequency
of occurrence of an air contaminant or multiple contaminants in the ambient air
which shall not be exceeded.

(4) "Ambient
air" means the surrounding outside air.

(5)
"Authority" means any air pollution control agency whose
jurisdictional boundaries are coextensive with the boundaries of one or more
counties.

(6) "Best
available control technology" (BACT) means an emission limitation based on
the maximum degree of reduction for each air pollutant subject to regulation
under this chapter emitted from or that results from any new or modified
stationary source, that the permitting authority, on a case-by-case basis,
taking into account energy, environmental, and economic impacts and other
costs, determines is achievable for such a source or modification through
application of production processes and available methods, systems, and
techniques, including fuel cleaning, clean fuels, or treatment or innovative
fuel combustion techniques for control of each such a pollutant. In no event
shall application of "best available control technology" result in
emissions of any pollutants that will exceed the emissions allowed by any
applicable standard under 40 C.F.R. Part 60 and Part 61, as they exist on July
25, 1993, or their later enactments as adopted by reference by the director by
rule. Emissions from any source utilizing clean fuels, or any other means, to
comply with this subsection shall not be allowed to increase above levels that
would have been required under the definition of BACT as it existed prior to
enactment of the (([federal])) federal clean air act amendments
of 1990.

(7) "Best
available retrofit technology" (BART) means an emission limitation based
on the degree of reduction achievable through the application of the best
system of continuous emission reduction for each pollutant that is emitted by
an existing stationary facility. The emission limitation must be established,
on a case-by-case basis, taking into consideration the technology available,
the costs of compliance, the energy and nonair quality environmental impacts of
compliance, any pollution control equipment in use or in existence at the
source, the remaining useful life of the source, and the degree of improvement
in visibility that might reasonably be anticipated to result from the use of
the technology.

(8) "Board"
means the board of directors of an authority.

(9) "Clean
alternative fuel vehicle" means a motor vehicle, as defined in RCW
46.04.320, originally designed and equipped by the manufacturer to operate:
(a) Exclusively on alternative fuels; (b) as a hybrid vehicle powered by a
combination of an electric motor and an engine powered by gasoline, diesel, or
an alternative fuel, weighing less than ten thousand pounds gross vehicle
weight, that has an average estimated fuel economy rating, as determined by the
environmental protection agency's national vehicle and fuel emissions
laboratory, of at least forty miles per gallon; (c) as a hybrid vehicle powered
by a combination of an electric motor and an engine powered by gasoline,
diesel, or an alternate fuel, weighing at least ten thousand pounds gross
vehicle weight, where the electric motor or battery system provides a
percentage of maximum available power of at least forty percent, relative to
the internal combustion engine; or (d) as a fuel cell vehicle powered by
gasoline or an alternative fuel. Vehicles less than twelve thousand pounds
gross vehicle weight must also meet or exceed the federal emission standards
for ultra-low emission vehicles. For purposes of this subsection,
"alternative fuels" are defined as natural gas, propane, hydrogen,
and electricity. For the purposes of this subsection only, the term
"maximum available power" means the maximum power available for the
battery or other electrical storage device during a standard ten-second pulse
power test, divided by the vehicle's total traction power, and the term
"total traction power" means the sum of the electric motor peak power
and the heat engine peak power of the vehicle, except that if the electric
motor is the sole means by which the vehicle can be driven, the total traction
power is the peak electric motor power.

(10)
"Control officer" means the air pollution control officer of any
authority.

(((10))) (11)
"Department" or "ecology" means the department of ecology.

(((11))) (12)
"Emission" means a release of air contaminants into the ambient air.

(((12))) (13)
"Emission standard" and "emission limitation" mean a
requirement established under the federal clean air act or this chapter that
limits the quantity, rate, or concentration of emissions of air contaminants on
a continuous basis, including any requirement relating to the operation or
maintenance of a source to assure continuous emission reduction, and any
design, equipment, work practice, or operational standard adopted under the
federal clean air act or this chapter.

(((13))) (14)
"Lowest achievable emission rate" (LAER) means for any source that
rate of emissions that reflects:

(a) The most stringent
emission limitation that is contained in the implementation plan of any state
for such class or category of source, unless the owner or operator of the proposed
source demonstrates that such limitations are not achievable; or

(b) The most stringent
emission limitation that is achieved in practice by such class or category of
source, whichever is more stringent.

In no event shall the
application of this term permit a proposed new or modified source to emit any
pollutant in excess of the amount allowable under applicable new source
performance standards.

(((14))) (15)
"Modification" means any physical change in, or change in the method
of operation of, a stationary source that increases the amount of any air
contaminant emitted by such source or that results in the emission of any air
contaminant not previously emitted. The term modification shall be construed
consistent with the definition of modification in Section 7411, Title 42,
United States Code, and with rules implementing that section.

(((15))) (16)
"Multicounty authority" means an authority which consists of two or
more counties.

(((16))) (17)
"New source" means (a) the construction or modification of a
stationary source that increases the amount of any air contaminant emitted by
such source or that results in the emission of any air contaminant not
previously emitted, and (b) any other project that constitutes a new source
under the federal clean air act.

(((17))) (18)
"Permit program source" means a source required to apply for or to
maintain an operating permit under RCW 70.94.161.

(((18))) (19)
"Person" means an individual, firm, public or private corporation,
association, partnership, political subdivision of the state, municipality, or
governmental agency.

(((19))) (20)
"Reasonably available control technology" (RACT) means the lowest
emission limit that a particular source or source category is capable of
meeting by the application of control technology that is reasonably available
considering technological and economic feasibility. RACT is determined on a
case-by-case basis for an individual source or source category taking into
account the impact of the source upon air quality, the availability of
additional controls, the emission reduction to be achieved by additional
controls, the impact of additional controls on air quality, and the capital and
operating costs of the additional controls. RACT requirements for a source or
source category shall be adopted only after notice and opportunity for comment
are afforded.

(((20))) (21)
"Silvicultural burning" means burning of wood fiber on forest land
consistent with the provisions of RCW 70.94.660.

(((21))) (22)
"Source" means all of the emissions units including quantifiable
fugitive emissions, that are located on one or more contiguous or adjacent
properties, and are under the control of the same person, or persons under
common control, whose activities are ancillary to the production of a single
product or functionally related group of products.

(((22))) (23)
"Stationary source" means any building, structure, facility, or
installation that emits or may emit any air contaminant.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
3. A new section is added
to chapter 82.04 RCW to read as follows:

(1) Persons who are
taxable under this chapter may take a credit for the purchase, or the lease for
a period of at least three years, of new clean alternative fuel vehicles as
defined in RCW 70.94.030(9) (a), (b), (c), or (d), if the vehicles are
exclusively used in business operations. The credit is based upon the
following schedule:

VEHICLE TONNAGE
CREDIT

Less than 12,000 pounds
gross 25 percent of the base cost

vehicle weight
or $5,000, whichever is less

12,000 pounds or more
gross 25 percent of the base cost

vehicle weight
or $20,000, whichever is less

(2) The credit may not
exceed the amount of tax that would otherwise be due under this chapter. The
credit may be accrued and carried over until it is used. Refunds shall not be
granted in place of credits. The maximum amount of credit under this section
that may be claimed, by each person, for any calendar year shall not exceed two
hundred thousand dollars.

(3) Tax credit may not
be claimed for expenditures that occurred before the effective date of this
section or expenditures that occur after the date specified in section 6 of
this act.

(4) The tax credit for
vehicles defined under RCW 70.94.030(9)(b) expires June 30, 2004.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
4. A new section is added
to chapter 82.04 RCW to read as follows:

(1) Persons who are
taxable under this chapter and provide financial assistance for the purchase,
or the lease for a period of at least three years, of new clean alternative
fuel vehicles as defined in RCW 70.94.030 to school districts, transit
agencies, and local governments may take a credit for amounts paid, if the
vehicles are used for public transit. School buses are considered public
transit for purposes of this section.

(2) The credit may not
exceed the amount of tax that would otherwise be due under this chapter. The
credit may be accrued and carried over until it is used. Refunds shall not be
granted in place of credits. The maximum amount of credit under this section
that may be claimed, by each person, for any calendar year shall not exceed two
hundred thousand dollars.

(3) Tax credit may not
be claimed for financial assistance that occurred before the effective date of
this section or financial assistance that occurs after the date specified in
section 6 of this act.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
5. A new section is added
to chapter 82.04 RCW to read as follows:

(1) Persons who are
taxable under this chapter may take a credit for the costs expended for
acquiring and installing alternative fuel and electric vehicle recharging
equipment, including alternative fuel storage tanks. "Alternative
fuel" means natural gas, propane, hydrogen, fuel containing a minimum of
eighty‑five percent ethanol, and fuel containing a minimum of twenty
percent biodiesel. The credit is based upon the following schedule:

(a) Fifty percent of
the costs incurred at facilities open to the public not to exceed two hundred
thousand dollars; and

(b) Twenty‑five
percent of the costs incurred at facilities not open to the public not to
exceed one hundred thousand dollars.

(2) The credit may not
exceed the amount of tax that would otherwise be due under this chapter. The
credit may be accrued and carried over until it is used. Refunds shall not be
granted in place of credits. The maximum amount of credit under this section
that may be claimed, by each person, for any calendar year shall not exceed one
million dollars.

(3) Tax credit may not
be claimed for expenditures that occurred before the effective date of this
section or expenditures that occur after the date specified in section 6 of
this act.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
6. A new section is added
to chapter 82.04 RCW to read as follows:

Tax credits under
sections 3 through 5 of this act are not allowed for expenditures that occur
after December 31, 2010.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
7. A new section is added
to chapter 70.94 RCW to read as follows:

The Washington State
University energy program, in consultation with the departments of ecology,
revenue, and licensing; local governments; vehicle manufacturers and suppliers;
and other interested parties shall collect and review the relevant data
associated with the provisions of chapter . . ., Laws of 2002 (this
act) and evaluate the effectiveness of these incentives in improving air
quality and increasing the use of clean alternative fuel vehicles. The
Washington State University energy program shall present its findings and make
recommendations as appropriate to the legislature biennially on or before
November 30th, beginning in 2005.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
8. Sections 1 through 6 of
this act take effect August 1, 2002.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
9. Section 7 of this act
takes effect January 1, 2003.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 10. Section 7 of this act
expires December 31, 2010.

---
END ---