BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF
WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1. RCW 46.16.230 and 1992 c
7 s 41 are each amended to read as follows:

The director shall
furnish to all persons making satisfactory application for vehicle license as
provided by law, two identical vehicle license number plates each containing
the vehicle license number to be displayed on such vehicle as by law required((:
PROVIDED, That)). If the vehicle to be licensed is a trailer,
semitrailer, or motorcycle only one vehicle license number plate shall
be issued for each thereof. The number and plate shall be of such size and
color and shall contain such symbols indicative of the registration period for
which the same is issued and of the state of Washington, as shall be determined
and prescribed by the director. Any vehicle license number plate or plates
issued to a dealer shall contain thereon a sufficient and satisfactory
indication that such plates have been issued to a dealer in vehicles. All
vehicle license number plates may be obtained by the director from the metal
working plant of a state correctional facility or from any source in accordance
with existing state of Washington purchasing procedures.

Notwithstanding the
foregoing provisions of this section, the director may, in his or her
discretion and under such rules and regulations as he or she may
prescribe, adopt a type of vehicle license number plates whereby the same shall
be used as long as legible on the vehicle for which issued, with provision for
tabs or emblems to be attached thereto or elsewhere on the vehicle to signify
renewals, in which event the term "vehicle license number plate" as
used in any enactment shall be deemed to include in addition to such plate the
tab or emblem signifying renewal except when such plate contains the
designation of the current year without reference to any tab or emblem. If
two license plates have been issued for the vehicle, the director shall issue
two identical tabs or emblems, one each to be affixed to the front and rear
plates. Renewals shall be effected by the issuance and display of such tabs
or emblems.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
2. A new section is added
to chapter 46.16 RCW to read as follows:

It is a misdemeanor to
display on a vehicle a license plate or registration tab other than that issued
for the vehicle or to display on a vehicle a license plate or registration tab
that has been knowingly changed or altered.

Sec. 3. RCW 46.16.240 and 1987 c
330 s 704 and 1987 c 142 s 3 are each reenacted and amended to read as follows:

(1) The vehicle
license number plates ((shall)) and tabs must be attached conspicuously
at the front and rear of each vehicle for which the same are issued and in such
a manner that they can be plainly seen and read at all times: PROVIDED, That
if only one license number plate or tab is legally issued for any
vehicle such plate ((shall)) or tab must be conspicuously
attached to the rear of such vehicle. Each vehicle license number plate ((shall))
and tab must be placed or hung in a horizontal position at a distance of
not less than one foot nor more than four feet from the ground and shall be
kept clean so as to be plainly seen and read at all times: PROVIDED, HOWEVER,
That in cases where the body construction of the vehicle is such that
compliance with this section is impossible, permission to deviate therefrom may
be granted by the state patrol.

(2) It ((shall
be unlawful)) is a traffic infraction to display upon the front or
rear of any vehicle, ((vehicle license number plate or plates other than
those furnished by the director for such vehicle or to display upon any vehicle
any)) a vehicle license number plate or ((plates which have))
tab that has, without the knowing act of the vehicle operator or registered
owner, been in any manner ((changed, altered,)) disfigured or ((have))
has become illegible.

(3) License
plate frames may be used on vehicle license number plates only if the frames do
not obscure license tabs or identifying letters or numbers on the plates and
the plates can be plainly seen and read at all times. It is ((unlawful))
a traffic infraction to use any holders, frames, or any materials that
in any manner change, alter, or make the vehicle license number plates
illegible.

(4) Except for an
offense constituting a misdemeanor under section 2 of this act, it ((shall
be unlawful)) is a traffic infraction for any person to operate any
vehicle unless there ((shall be)) is displayed thereon valid
vehicle license number plates and tabs attached as ((herein))
provided in this section.

Sec. 4. RCW 46.63.020 and 2001 c
325 s 4 are each amended to read as follows:

Failure to perform any
act required or the performance of any act prohibited by this title or an
equivalent administrative regulation or local law, ordinance, regulation, or
resolution relating to traffic including parking, standing, stopping, and
pedestrian offenses, is designated as a traffic infraction and may not be
classified as a criminal offense, except for an offense contained in the
following provisions of this title or a violation of an equivalent
administrative regulation or local law, ordinance, regulation, or resolution:

(1) RCW 46.09.120(2)
relating to the operation of a nonhighway vehicle while under the influence of
intoxicating liquor or a controlled substance;

(2) RCW 46.09.130
relating to operation of nonhighway vehicles;

(3) RCW 46.10.090(2)
relating to the operation of a snowmobile while under the influence of
intoxicating liquor or narcotics or habit‑forming drugs or in a manner
endangering the person of another;

(4) RCW 46.10.130
relating to the operation of snowmobiles;

(5) Chapter 46.12 RCW
relating to certificates of ownership and registration and markings indicating
that a vehicle has been destroyed or declared a total loss;

(6) RCW 46.16.010
relating to initial registration of motor vehicles;

(7) RCW 46.16.011
relating to permitting unauthorized persons to drive;

(8) RCW 46.16.160
relating to vehicle trip permits;

(9) Section 2 of
this act relating to display of improper license plates or tabs;

(10) RCW
46.16.381(2) relating to knowingly providing false information in conjunction
with an application for a special placard or license plate for disabled
persons' parking;

(((10))) (11)
RCW 46.20.005 relating to driving without a valid driver's license;

(((11))) (12)
RCW 46.20.091 relating to false statements regarding a driver's license or
instruction permit;

(((12))) (13)
RCW 46.20.0921 relating to the unlawful possession and use of a driver's
license;

(((13))) (14)
RCW 46.20.342 relating to driving with a suspended or revoked license or
status;

(((14))) (15)
RCW 46.20.345 relating to the operation of a motor vehicle with a suspended or
revoked license;

(((15))) (16)
RCW 46.20.410 relating to the violation of restrictions of an occupational
driver's license;

(((16))) (17)
RCW 46.20.740 relating to operation of a motor vehicle without an ignition
interlock device in violation of a license notation that the device is
required;

(((17))) (18)
RCW 46.20.750 relating to assisting another person to start a vehicle equipped
with an ignition interlock device;

(((18))) (19)
RCW 46.25.170 relating to commercial driver's licenses;

(((19))) (20)
Chapter 46.29 RCW relating to financial responsibility;

(((20))) (21)
RCW 46.30.040 relating to providing false evidence of financial responsibility;

(((21))) (22)
RCW 46.37.435 relating to wrongful installation of sunscreening material;

(((22))) (23)
RCW 46.44.180 relating to operation of mobile home pilot vehicles;

(((23))) (24)
RCW 46.48.175 relating to the transportation of dangerous articles;

(((24))) (25)
RCW 46.52.010 relating to duty on striking an unattended car or other property;

(((25))) (26)
RCW 46.52.020 relating to duty in case of injury to or death of a person or
damage to an attended vehicle;

(((26))) (27)
RCW 46.52.090 relating to reports by repairmen, storagemen, and appraisers;

(((27))) (28)
RCW 46.52.130 relating to confidentiality of the driving record to be furnished
to an insurance company, an employer, and an alcohol/drug assessment or treatment
agency;

(((28))) (29)
RCW 46.55.020 relating to engaging in the activities of a registered tow truck
operator without a registration certificate;

(((29))) (30)
RCW 46.55.035 relating to prohibited practices by tow truck operators;

(((30))) (31)
RCW 46.61.015 relating to obedience to police officers, flaggers, or fire
fighters;

(((31))) (32)
RCW 46.61.020 relating to refusal to give information to or cooperate with an
officer;

(((32))) (33)
RCW 46.61.022 relating to failure to stop and give identification to an
officer;

(((33))) (34)
RCW 46.61.024 relating to attempting to elude pursuing police vehicles;

(((34))) (35)
RCW 46.61.500 relating to reckless driving;

(((35))) (36)
RCW 46.61.502 and 46.61.504 relating to persons under the influence of
intoxicating liquor or drugs;

(((36))) (37)
RCW 46.61.503 relating to a person under age twenty-one driving a motor vehicle
after consuming alcohol;

(((37))) (38)
RCW 46.61.520 relating to vehicular homicide by motor vehicle;

(((38))) (39)
RCW 46.61.522 relating to vehicular assault;

(((39))) (40)
RCW 46.61.5249 relating to first degree negligent driving;

(((40))) (41)
RCW 46.61.527(4) relating to reckless endangerment of roadway workers;

(((41))) (42)
RCW 46.61.530 relating to racing of vehicles on highways;

(((42))) (43)
RCW 46.61.685 relating to leaving children in an unattended vehicle with the
motor running;

(((43))) (44)
RCW 46.61.740 relating to theft of motor vehicle fuel;

(((44))) (45)
RCW 46.64.010 relating to unlawful cancellation of or attempt to cancel a
traffic citation;

(((45))) (46)
RCW 46.64.048 relating to attempting, aiding, abetting, coercing, and
committing crimes;

(((46))) (47)
Chapter 46.65 RCW relating to habitual traffic offenders;

(((47))) (48)
RCW 46.68.010 relating to false statements made to obtain a refund;

(((48))) (49)
Chapter 46.70 RCW relating to unfair motor vehicle business practices, except
where that chapter provides for the assessment of monetary penalties of a civil
nature;

(((49))) (50)
Chapter 46.72 RCW relating to the transportation of passengers in for hire
vehicles;

(((50))) (51)
RCW 46.72A.060 relating to limousine carrier insurance;

(((51))) (52)
RCW 46.72A.070 relating to operation of a limousine without a vehicle
certificate;

(((52))) (53)
RCW 46.72A.080 relating to false advertising by a limousine carrier;

(((53))) (54)
Chapter 46.80 RCW relating to motor vehicle wreckers;

(((54))) (55)
Chapter 46.82 RCW relating to driver's training schools;

(((55))) (56)
RCW 46.87.260 relating to alteration or forgery of a cab card, letter of
authority, or other temporary authority issued under chapter 46.87 RCW;

(((56)))
(57) RCW 46.87.290 relating to operation of an unregistered or
unlicensed vehicle under chapter 46.87 RCW.

---
END ---