BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF
WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1. RCW 77.85.190 and 1999
sp.s. c 4 s 1301 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) Chapter 4, Laws of
1999 sp. sess. has been enacted on the assumption that the federal assurances
described in the forests and fish report as defined in RCW 76.09.020 will be
obtained and that forest practices conducted in accordance with chapter 4, Laws
of 1999 sp. sess. and the rules adopted under chapter 4, Laws of 1999 sp. sess.
will not be subject to additional regulations or restrictions for aquatic
resources except as provided in the forests and fish report.

(2) The occurrence of
any of the following events shall constitute a failure of assurances:

(a) Either (i) the
national marine fisheries service or the United States fish and wildlife
service fails to promulgate an effective rule under 16 U.S.C. Sec. 1533(d)
covering each aquatic resource that is listed as threatened under the
endangered species act within two years after the date on which the aquatic
resource is so listed or, in the case of bull trout, within two years after
August 18, 1999; or (ii) any such rule fails to permit any incidental take that
would occur from the conduct of forest practices in compliance with the rules
adopted under chapter 4, Laws of 1999 sp. sess. or fails to confirm that such
forest practices would not otherwise be in violation of the endangered species
act and the regulations promulgated under that act. However, this subsection
(2)(a) is not applicable to any aquatic resource covered by an incidental take
permit described in (c) of this subsection;

(b) Either the national
marine fisheries service or the United States fish and wildlife service shall
promulgate an effective rule under 16 U.S.C. Sec. 1533(d) covering any aquatic
resource that would preclude the conduct of forest practices consistent with
the prescriptions outlined in the forests and fish report. However, this
subsection (2)(b) is not applicable to any aquatic resource covered by an
incidental take permit described in (c) of this subsection;

(c) Either the
secretary of the interior or the secretary of commerce fails to issue an
acceptable incidental take permit under 16 U.S.C. Sec. 1539(a) covering all
fish and wildlife species included within aquatic resources on or before June
30, ((2003)) 2005. An acceptable incidental take permit will (i)
permit the incidental take, if any, of all fish and wildlife species included
within aquatic resources resulting from the conduct of forest practices in
compliance with the prescriptions outlined in the forests and fish report; (ii)
provide protection to the state of Washington and its subdivisions and to
landowners and operators; (iii) not require the commitment of additional
resources beyond those required to be committed under the forests and fish
report; and (iv) provide "no-surprises" protection as described in 50
C.F.R. Parts 17 and 222 (1998);

(d) Either the national
marine fisheries service or the United States fish and wildlife service fails
to promulgate an effective rule under 16 U.S.C. Sec. 1533(d) within five years
after the date on which a fish species is listed as threatened or endangered
under the endangered species act which prohibits actions listed under 16 U.S.C.
1538;

(e) The environmental
protection agency or department of ecology fails to provide the clean water act
assurances described in appendix M to the forests and fish report; or

(f) The assurances
described in (a) through (e) of this subsection are reversed or otherwise
rendered ineffective by subsequent federal legislation or rule making or by
final decision of any court of competent jurisdiction.

Upon the occurrence of
a failure of assurances, any agency, tribe, or other interested person
including, without limitation, any forest landowner, may provide written notice
of the occurrence of such failure of assurances to the legislature and to the
office of the governor. Promptly upon receipt of such a notice, the governor
shall review relevant information and if he or she determines that a failure of
assurances has occurred, the governor shall make such a finding in a written
report with recommendations and deliver such report to the legislature. Upon
notice of the occurrence of a failure of assurances, the legislature shall
review chapter 4, Laws of 1999 sp. sess., all rules adopted by the forest
practices board, the department of ecology, or the department of fish and
wildlife at any time after January 1, 1999, that were adopted primarily for the
protection of one or more aquatic resources and affect forest practices and the
terms of the forests and fish report, and shall take such action, including the
termination of funding or the modification of other statutes, as it deems
appropriate.

(3) The
governor may negotiate with federal officials, directly or through designated
representatives, on behalf of the state and its agencies and subdivisions, to
obtain assurances from federal agencies to the effect that compliance with the
forest practices rules as amended under chapter 4, Laws of 1999 sp. sess. and
implementation of the recommendations in the forests and fish report will
satisfy federal requirements under the endangered species act and the clean
water act and related regulations, including the negotiation of a rule adopted
under section 4(d) of the endangered species act, entering into implementation
agreements and receiving incidental take permits under section 10 of the
endangered species act or entering into other intergovernmental agreements.

--- END ---