BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF
WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1. RCW 46.20.055 and 1999 c
274 s 13 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) Driver's
instruction permit. The department may issue a driver's instruction permit
with or without a photograph to an applicant who has successfully passed
all parts of the examination other than the driving test, provided the
information required by RCW 46.20.091, paid a ((five-dollar)) fifteen-dollar
fee, plus an additional fifteen-dollar fee to fund traffic safety education
in the public schools, and meets the following requirements:

(a) Is at least fifteen
and one-half years of age; or

(b) Is at least fifteen
years of age and:

(i) Has submitted a
proper application; and

(ii) Is enrolled in a
traffic safety education program approved and accredited by the superintendent
of public instruction that includes practice driving.

(2) ((Nonphoto
permit fee. An applicant who meets the requirements of subsection
(1) of this section other than payment of the five-dollar fee may obtain a
driver's instruction permit without a photograph by paying a fee of four
dollars.

(3))) Waiver of written examination for
instruction permit. The department may waive the written examination, if,
at the time of application, an applicant is enrolled in:

(a) A traffic safety
education course as defined by RCW 28A.220.020(2); or

(b) A course of
instruction offered by a licensed driver training school as defined by RCW
46.82.280(1).

The department may
require proof of registration in such a course as it deems necessary.

(((4))) (3)
Effect of instruction permit. A person holding a driver's instruction
permit may drive a motor vehicle, other than a motorcycle, upon the public
highways if:

(a) The person has
immediate possession of the permit; and

(b) An approved
instructor, or a licensed driver with at least five years of driving
experience, occupies the seat beside the driver.

(((5))) (4)
Term of instruction permit. A driver's instruction permit is valid for
one year from the date of issue.

(a) The department may
issue one additional one-year permit.

(b) The
department may issue a third driver's permit if it finds after an investigation
that the permittee is diligently seeking to improve driving proficiency.

Sec. 2. RCW 46.20.120 and 1999 c
308 s 1 and 1999 c 199 s 3 are each reenacted and amended to read as follows:

An applicant for a new
or renewed driver's license must successfully pass a driver licensing examination
to qualify for a driver's license. The department shall give examinations at
places and times reasonably available to the people of this state.

(1) Waiver. The
department may waive:

(a) All or any part of
the examination of any person applying for the renewal of a driver's license
unless the department determines that the applicant is not qualified to hold a
driver's license under this title; or

(b) The actual
demonstration of the ability to operate a motor vehicle if the applicant:

(i) Surrenders a valid
driver's license issued by the person's previous home state; and

(ii) Is otherwise
qualified to be licensed.

(2) Fee. Each
applicant for a new license must pay an examination fee of ((seven)) ten
dollars, plus an additional fee of fifteen dollars to fund traffic safety
education in the public schools.

(a) The examination fee
is in addition to the fee charged for issuance of the license.

(b) "New
license" means a license issued to a driver:

(i) Who has not been
previously licensed in this state; or

(ii) Whose last
previous Washington license has been expired for more than five years.

(3) A person whose
license expired or will expire on or after January 1, 1998, while he or she was
or is living outside the state may:

(a) Apply to the
department to extend the validity of his or her license for no more than twelve
months. If the person establishes to the department's satisfaction that he or
she is unable to return to Washington before the date his or her license
expires, the department shall extend the person's license. The department may
grant consecutive extensions, but in no event may the cumulative total of
extensions exceed twelve months. An extension granted under this section does
not change the expiration date of the license for purposes of RCW 46.20.181.
The department shall charge a fee of five dollars for each license extension;

(b) Apply to the
department to renew his or her license by mail. If the person establishes to
the department's satisfaction that he or she is unable to return to Washington
within twelve months of the date that his or her license expires, the
department shall renew the person's license by mail. If a person qualifies for
a mail-in renewal he or she is not required to pass an examination nor provide
an updated photograph. He or she must, however, pay the fee required by RCW
46.20.181 plus an additional five-dollar mail-in renewal fee. A license
renewed by mail that does not include a photograph of the licensee must be
labeled "not valid for identification purposes."

(4) If a person's
driver's license is extended or renewed under subsection (3) of this section
while he or she is outside the state, he or she must submit to the examination
required under this section within sixty days of returning to this state. The
department will not assess a penalty or examination fee for the examination.

Sec. 3. RCW 46.68.041 and 1998 c
212 s 3 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) ((Except as
provided in subsection (2) of this section,)) The department shall
forward all funds accruing under the provisions of chapter 46.20 RCW together
with a proper identifying, detailed report to the state treasurer ((who
shall deposit such moneys to the credit of the highway safety fund)).

(2) The state
treasurer shall deposit fifteen dollars of each driver's instruction permit fee
collected under the provisions of RCW 46.20.055(1) and fifteen dollars of each
driver's license examination fee collected under the provisions of RCW
46.20.120(2) to the credit of the public safety and education account for use
in traffic safety education in public schools.

(3) The state
treasurer shall deposit sixty-three percent of each fee collected by the
department under RCW 46.20.311 (1)(b)(ii), (2)(b)(ii), and (3)(b) ((shall be
deposited in)) to the credit of the impaired driving safety account.

(4) The state
treasurer shall deposit the remainder of the funds collected under subsections
(1), (2), and (3) of this section to the credit of the highway safety fund.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 4. This act takes effect
July 1, 2002.

---
END ---