BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF
WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec.
1. (1) The secretary shall
establish demonstration sites for statewide implementation of a children's
system of care. The demonstration sites shall be selected using the following
criteria:

(a) The system
administrator must be the recipient of funding by the federal center for mental
health services for the purpose of developing a system of care for children
with emotional and behavioral disorders; and

(b) The system
administrator may be a project site under a Title IV-E waiver.

(2) For the purposes of
this section, "children's system of care" means a centralized
community care coordination system representing a philosophy about the way
services should be delivered to children and their families, using existing
resources of various child-serving agencies addressing the problems of children
with emotional and behavioral disorders. The agencies represented may include
providers of mental health services, drug and alcohol services, services for
the developmentally disabled, county juvenile justice and state juvenile
rehabilitation, child welfare, and special education.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
2. The goals of the
children's system of care are to:

(1) Maintain a
multiagency collaborative planning and system management mechanism at the state
and local levels through the establishment of an oversight committee at the
local level in accordance with the principles and program requirements
associated with the federal center for children's mental health services;

(2) Recommend and make
necessary financing changes to support individualized and flexible home and
community‑based services and supports that are child centered, family
driven, strength based, and culturally competent;

(3) Support a common
screening tool and integrated care coordination system;

(4) Recommend and make
necessary changes in contracting to support integrated service delivery;

(5) Promote and
increase the expansion of system capacity for children and their families in
each demonstration site community;

(6) Develop the capacity
of family members to provide support for one another and to strengthen the
family voice in system implementation through the utilization of a citizens'
advisory board as described in section 5 of this act and through other outreach
activities;

(7) Conduct research
and draw on outside consultation to identify best practices to inform system
development and refinement; and

(8) Demonstrate cost‑effectiveness
by creating system efficiencies that generate savings from the current level of
expenditures for children being served by the participating agencies. These
savings must be used to provide more services to the children involved in the
project, or to serve more children.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
3. The secretary shall assure
collaboration with each demonstration site by child-serving entities operated
directly by the department or by departmental contractors. A collaboration
contract or memorandum of understanding shall be developed by the demonstration
site and the secretary for that purpose.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
4. A new section is added
to chapter 28A.300 RCW to read as follows:

It is the expectation
of the legislature that local school districts shall collaborate with each
children's system of care demonstration site established under section 1 of
this act.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
5. (1) A citizens' advisory
board and the agencies participating in each demonstration site for a
children's system of care established under section 1 of this act shall
establish evaluation criteria consistent with the goals set forth in section 2
of this act. The evaluation criteria shall be developed no later than sixty
days after the effective date of this act.

(2) The evaluation
shall be conducted by an entity with experience in evaluating organizations
that are:

(a) Recipients of
funding by the federal center for mental health services for the purpose of
developing a system of care for children with emotional and behavioral
disorders; and

(b) A project site
under a Title IV-E waiver.

The demonstration site
shall submit a report to the children and family services committee of the
house of representatives and to the human services and corrections committee of
the senate, or their successors. An interim report shall be submitted to the
committees by December 1, 2002. A final report shall be submitted to the
committees by December 1, 2003.

(3) This section
expires January 1, 2004.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 6. Sections 1 through 3 of
this act constitute a new chapter in Title 74 RCW.

---
END ---