BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF
WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec.
1. The legislature finds
that there is growing evidence that the marine ecosystem in Puget Sound is in
serious decline. The depletion of marine resources has hurt economies and
communities around the Puget Sound. In particular, the serious decline of
marine fish has caused great concern. In response to this problem, a growing
number of local governments and state agencies have begun work constructing a
network of marine protected areas, where fishing and harvesting of marine organisms
are discouraged or prohibited. A primary goal of this effort is to rebuild
stocks of marine fish, over time, to harvestable levels. Local governments in
the Northwest Straits region have established marine resource committees to
help facilitate this process. The legislature recognizes there is a need to
expand this work into other parts of the Puget Sound. Furthermore, while the
legislature recognizes that much progress has been made in this area by both
state and local agencies, there is a need for better coordination among these
agencies so that limited financial resources are used in the most efficient and
effective manner possible.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
2. It is the policy of the
state of Washington to establish a scientifically defensible network of marine
protected areas in Puget Sound. The department, the department of ecology, the
department of natural resources, the Puget Sound action team, and the state
parks and recreation commission must work together and with local authorities
to achieve this goal.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
3. The legislative authority
for each city and county that borders the marine waters of Puget Sound is
authorized to establish marine resource committees. The mission of the
committee, utilizing sound science, is to address the needs of the local marine
ecosystem. The committees must review current data and programs and make
prioritized recommendations for additional measures that might be necessary to
enhance protection of marine resources. The goals of the committee include the
following:

(1) Use existing data
and, to the extent necessary, help gather new data on the health of local
marine resources. This includes a review of data compiled by state and federal
resource agencies;

(2) Make scientifically
based recommendations on local candidate sites for marine protected areas;

(3) Work closely with
local and state officials to help implement recommendations;

(4) Promote public
outreach and education around these issues; and

(5) Any other
activities that the participating city or county deems appropriate.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
4. (1) Marine resource
committees may be created by the legislative authority of a city or county
bordering the marine waters of Puget Sound. In doing so, cities and counties
must coordinate and cooperate with all appropriate special districts within
their boundaries in establishing the marine resource committee and implementing
its recommendations. County and city legislative authorities are encouraged to
coordinate, especially in areas where they border one another.

(2) Participating
county and city legislative authorities must select members of the marine
resource committee, ensuring balanced representation from: Local government;
scientific experts; effected economic interests; effected recreational
interests; and environmental and conservation interests.

(3) County and city
residents may petition the county or city legislative authority to create a
marine resource committee. Upon receipt of a petition, the city or county
legislative authority must respond in writing within sixty days as to whether
they will authorize the creation of a marine resource committee as well as the
reasons for their decision.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
5. Nothing in this chapter
is intended to expand or limit the authority of local marine resource
committees existing as of the effective date of this section.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
6. (1) The Puget Sound
marine protection task force is created. The task force must be chaired by the
Puget Sound action team and include representatives of the following state
agencies: The department of ecology; the department of fish and wildlife; the parks
and recreation commission; and the department of natural resources.

(2) By December 31,
2002, the task force must report to the legislature and provide recommendations
on ways in which state and local efforts to establish marine protected areas,
marine reserves, and similar programs can be better coordinated and make better
use of limited financial resources, while simultaneously ensuring protection of
the marine environment. Specifically, the task force must make recommendations
on the following:

(a) Mechanisms for
better coordination of state-level marine protection programs, including the
department of fish and wildlife's marine protected area designation and the
department of natural resources' marine reserves program; and

(b) Mechanisms for better
communication and coordination with local marine resource committees.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
7. In establishing marine
reserves and marine protected areas, state and local governments must recognize
the comanagement role of tribal governments. The state must coordinate on a
government-to-government basis with tribal governments prior to adopting any
marine reserve or marine protected area proposal.

Sec. 8. RCW 79.24.580 and 2001 c
227 s 7 are each amended to read as follows:

After deduction for
management costs as provided in RCW 79.64.040 and payments to towns under RCW
79.92.110(2), all moneys received by the state from the sale or lease of
state-owned aquatic lands and from the sale of valuable material from
state-owned aquatic lands shall be deposited in the aquatic lands enhancement
account which is hereby created in the state treasury. After appropriation,
these funds shall be used solely for aquatic lands enhancement projects; for
the purchase, improvement, or protection of aquatic lands for public purposes;
for providing and improving access to such lands; ((and)) for volunteer
cooperative fish and game projects; and for the funding of Puget Sound
marine resource committees created under the authority of chapter 77.-- RCW
(sections 1 through 5 and 7 of this act).

In providing grants for
aquatic lands enhancement projects, the department shall require grant
recipients to incorporate the environmental benefits of the project into their
grant applications, and the department shall utilize the statement of
environmental benefits in its prioritization and selection process. The
department shall also develop appropriate outcome-focused performance measures
to be used both for management and performance assessment of the grants. To
the extent possible, the department should coordinate its performance measure
system with other natural resource-related agencies as defined in RCW
43.41.270. The department shall consult with affected interest groups in
implementing this section.

During the fiscal
biennium ending June 30, 2001, the funds may be appropriated for boating
safety, shellfish management, enforcement, and enhancement and for developing
and implementing plans for population monitoring and restoration of native wild
salmon stock.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 9. Sections 1 through 5 and
7 of this act constitute a new chapter in Title 77 RCW.

---
END ---