BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF
WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec.
1. The legislature finds
that academic success rests on a foundation of character. The legislature
further finds that parents are the first and primary moral educators of
children, and that schools have a role in reinforcing the character traits and
values deemed important by parents and the local community. The legislature
further finds that when character education is integrated into a school's
curriculum there is a decline of incidences involving violence, bullying, and
harassment. The legislature intends to encourage school districts to integrate
character education into each school's curriculum. The legislature further
intends that local communities, in partnership with schools or school
districts, should have the responsibility for determining which character
traits and values are included in each district's or school's character education
program.

Sec. 2. RCW 28A.150.211 and 1994
c 245 s 10 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) The
legislature also recognizes that certain basic values and character traits are
essential to individual liberty, fulfillment, and happiness. However, these
values and traits are not intended to be assessed or be standards for
graduation. The legislature intends that local communities have the
responsibility for determining how these values and character traits are learned
as determined by consensus at the local level. These values and traits include
the importance of:

(((1))) (a)
Honesty, integrity, and trust;

(((2))) (b)
Respect for self and others;

(((3))) (c)
Responsibility for personal actions and commitments;

(((4))) (d)
Self-discipline and moderation;

(((5))) (e)
Diligence and a positive work ethic;

(((6))) (f)
Respect for law and authority;

(((7))) (g)
Healthy and positive behavior; and

(((8))) (h)
Family as the basis of society.

(2) Each school
district is strongly encouraged to develop and implement a character education
program that incorporates into its curriculum the character traits and values
included in subsection (1) of this section. Each school district is also
strongly encouraged to develop its character education program in partnership
with parents and all interested stakeholders in its local community. When
developing character education programs, school districts shall comply with the
open public meetings act, chapter 42.30 RCW.

(3) The office of
the superintendent of public instruction:

(a) Shall collect
and make available on its web site programs and instructional materials that
will help school districts, in consultation with parents and local community
members, teach students how to demonstrate in a school setting the character
traits in subsection (1) of this section;

(b) Shall include on
its web site a link to the safety center web page;

(c) May update with
new technologies access to this information in the safety center, to the extent
resources are made available; and

(d)
Shall permit individual school districts to have direct access to the safety
center web site to post a brief summary of their policies, programs,
partnerships, vendors, and instructional and training materials and to provide
a link to the school district's web site for further information.

---
END ---