BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF
WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1. RCW 41.40.710 and 2000 c
247 s 1106 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) A member who is on
a paid leave of absence authorized by a member's employer shall continue to
receive service credit as provided for under the provisions of RCW 41.40.610
through 41.40.740.

(2) A member who
receives compensation from an employer while on an authorized leave of absence
to serve as an elected official of a labor organization, and whose employer is
reimbursed by the labor organization for the compensation paid to the member
during the period of absence, may also be considered to be on a paid leave of
absence. This subsection shall only apply if the member's leave of absence is
authorized by a collective bargaining agreement that provides that the member
retains seniority rights with the employer during the period of leave. The
compensation earnable reported for a member who establishes service credit
under this subsection may not be greater than the salary paid to the highest
paid job class covered by the collective bargaining agreement.

(3) Except as specified
in subsection (4) of this section, a member shall be eligible to receive a
maximum of two years service credit during a member's entire working career for
those periods when a member is on an unpaid leave of absence authorized by an
employer. Such credit may be obtained only if:

(a) The member makes
both the plan 2 employer and member contributions plus interest as determined
by the department for the period of the authorized leave of absence within five
years of resumption of service or prior to retirement whichever comes sooner;
or

(b) If not within five
years of resumption of service but prior to retirement, pay the amount required
under RCW 41.50.165(2).

The contributions
required under (a) of this subsection shall be based on the average of the
member's compensation earnable at both the time the authorized leave of absence
was granted and the time the member resumed employment.

(4) A member who leaves
the employ of an employer to enter the armed forces of the United States shall
be entitled to retirement system service credit for up to five years of
military service. This subsection shall be administered in a manner consistent
with the requirements of the federal uniformed services employment and
reemployment rights act.

(a) The member
qualifies for service credit under this subsection if:

(i) Within ninety days
of the member's honorable discharge from the United States armed forces, the
member applies for reemployment with the employer who employed the member
immediately prior to the member entering the United States armed forces; and

(ii) The member makes
the employee contributions required under RCW 41.45.061 and 41.45.067 within
five years of resumption of service or prior to retirement, whichever comes
sooner; or

(iii) Prior to
retirement and not within ninety days of the member's honorable discharge or
five years of resumption of service the member pays the amount required under
RCW 41.50.165(2).

(b) Upon receipt of
member contributions under (a)(ii) of this subsection, the department shall
establish the member's service credit and shall bill the employer for its
contribution required under RCW 41.45.060, 41.45.061, and 41.45.067 for the
period of military service, plus interest as determined by the department.

(c) The contributions
required under (a)(ii) of this subsection shall be based on the compensation
the member would have earned if not on leave, or if that cannot be estimated
with reasonable certainty, the compensation reported for the member in the year
prior to when the member went on military leave.

(5)(a) After
completing twenty-five years of creditable service, any member who is a veteran
of the Vietnam conflict may have service in the armed forces credited to him or
her as a member whether or not he or she left the employ of an employer to
enter the armed forces. However, (i) in no instance under this subsection may
military service in excess of five years be credited, and (ii) in each instance
the member must restore all withdrawn accumulated contributions, which
restoration must be completed within five years of membership service following
the first resumption of employment, or complete twenty-five years of creditable
service.

(b)
"Veteran of the Vietnam conflict" means a person who (i)(A) served in
the Republic of Vietnam during the period beginning February 28, 1961, and
ending May 7, 1975, or (B) served during the period beginning August 5, 1964,
and ending on May 7, 1975, and (ii) received an honorable discharge or received
a discharge for physical reasons with an honorable record.

--- END ---