BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF
WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1. RCW 28A.210.020 and 1971
c 32 s 2 are each amended to read as follows:

Every
board of school directors shall have the power, and it shall be its duty to
provide for and require screening for the visual and auditory acuity of all
children attending schools in their districts to ascertain which if any of such
children have defects sufficient to retard them in their studies. Visual
screening shall include, but need not be limited to, screening for distance and
near vision acuity. Auditory and visual screening shall be made in
accordance with procedures and standards adopted by rule or regulation of the
state board of health. Prior to the adoption or revision of such rules or
regulations the state board of health shall seek the recommendations of the superintendent
of public instruction regarding the administration of visual and auditory
screening and the qualifications of persons competent to administer such
screening.

--- END ---