BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF
WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec.
1. A new section is added
to chapter 1.20 RCW to read as follows:

The legislature finds
that uncertainty in government processes to permit an activity by a citizen of
Washington state is undesirable and erodes confidence in government.

Citizens of the state
of Washington have the following rights when asked for a permit, license, or
permission to engage in a lawful activity:

(1) Right to a specific
date in time for a yes or no decision on permits;

(2) Right to a defined
amount of information required to award permit by permitting authority before
any application for permits can be accepted;

(3) Right to know the
exact maximum amount of costs in fees, studies, or public processes that will
be incurred by the permit applicant;

(4) Right to recover
all costs and time lost in permitting processes from permitting authorities for
transgressions or violations or abuse of authority in the rights set forth in
this section, through civil process.

These
rights apply to permits, licenses, or other legal activity granting devices
from all government entities chartered in the state of Washington for all laws
or rules adopted after July 1, 2002, or all laws or rules changed or amended
after July 1, 2002.

--- END ---