BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF
WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1. RCW 58.17.040 and 1992 c
220 s 27 are each amended to read as follows:

The provisions of this
chapter shall not apply to:

(1) Cemeteries and
other burial plots while used for that purpose;

(2) Divisions of land
into lots or tracts each of which is one-one hundred twenty-eighth of a section
of land or larger, or five acres or larger if the land is not capable of
description as a fraction of a section of land, unless the governing authority
of the city, town, or county in which the land is situated shall have adopted a
subdivision ordinance requiring plat approval of such divisions: PROVIDED,
That for purposes of computing the size of any lot under this item which
borders on a street or road, the lot size shall be expanded to include that
area which would be bounded by the center line of the road or street and the
side lot lines of the lot running perpendicular to such center line;

(3) Divisions made by
testamentary provisions, or the laws of descent;

(4) Divisions of land
into lots or tracts classified for industrial or commercial use when the city,
town, or county has approved a binding site plan for the use of the land in accordance
with local regulations;

(5) A division for the
purpose of lease when no residential structure other than mobile homes or
travel trailers are permitted to be placed upon the land when the city, town,
or county has approved a binding site plan for the use of the land in
accordance with local regulations;

(6) A division made for
the purpose of alteration by adjusting boundary lines, between platted or
unplatted lots or both, which does not create any additional lot, tract,
parcel, site, or division nor create any lot, tract, parcel, site, or division
which contains insufficient area and dimension to meet minimum requirements for
width and area for a building site; ((and))

(7) Divisions of land
into lots or tracts if: (a) Such division is the result of subjecting a
portion of a parcel or tract of land to either chapter 64.32 or 64.34 RCW
subsequent to the recording of a binding site plan for all such land; (b) the
improvements constructed or to be constructed thereon are required by the
provisions of the binding site plan to be included in one or more condominiums
or owned by an association or other legal entity in which the owners of units
therein or their owners' associations have a membership or other legal or
beneficial interest; (c) a city, town, or county has approved the binding site
plan for all such land; (d) such approved binding site plan is recorded in the
county or counties in which such land is located; and (e) the binding site plan
contains thereon the following statement: "All development and use of the
land described herein shall be in accordance with this binding site plan, as it
may be amended with the approval of the city, town, or county having
jurisdiction over the development of such land, and in accordance with such
other governmental permits, approvals, regulations, requirements, and
restrictions that may be imposed upon such land and the development and use
thereof. Upon completion, the improvements on the land shall be included in
one or more condominiums or owned by an association or other legal entity in
which the owners of units therein or their owners' associations have a
membership or other legal or beneficial interest. This binding site plan shall
be binding upon all now or hereafter having any interest in the land described
herein." The binding site plan may, but need not, depict or describe the
boundaries of the lots or tracts resulting from subjecting a portion of the
land to either chapter 64.32 or 64.34 RCW. A site plan shall be deemed to have
been approved if the site plan was approved by a city, town, or county: (i) In
connection with the final approval of a subdivision plat or planned unit
development with respect to all of such land; or (ii) in connection with the
issuance of building permits or final certificates of occupancy with respect to
all of such land; or (iii) if not approved pursuant to (i) and (ii) of this
subsection (7)(e), then pursuant to such other procedures as such city, town,
or county may have established for the approval of a binding site plan; and

(8) A
division for the purpose of leasing land for facilities providing personal
wireless services while used for that purpose. "Personal wireless
services" means any federally licensed personal wireless service.
"Facilities" means unstaffed facilities that are used for the
transmission or reception, or both, of wireless communication services
including, but not necessarily limited to, antenna arrays, transmission cables,
equipment shelters, and support structures.

--- END ---