BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF
WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1. RCW 42.17.350 and 1998 c
30 s 1 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) There is hereby
established a "public disclosure commission" which shall be composed
of five members who shall be appointed by the governor, with the consent of the
senate. All appointees shall be persons of the highest integrity and
qualifications. No more than three members shall have an identification with
the same political party.

(2) The term of each
member shall be five years. No member is eligible for appointment to more than
one full term. Any member may be removed by the governor, but only upon
grounds of neglect of duty or misconduct in office.

(3) No person may
serve on the commission who is not a registered voter of the state at the time
of selection.

(4) During his
or her tenure, a member of the commission is prohibited from engaging in any of
the following activities, either within or outside the state of Washington:

(a) ((Holding or
campaigning for elective office;

(b))) Serving as an officer of any political party
or political committee;

(((c))) (b)
Permitting his or her name to be used in support of or in opposition to a
candidate or proposition;

(((d))) (c)
Soliciting or making contributions to a candidate or in support of or in
opposition to any candidate or proposition;

(((e))) (d)
Participating in any way in any election campaign; or

(((f))) (e)
Lobbying, employing, or assisting a lobbyist, except that a member or the staff
of the commission may lobby to the limited extent permitted by RCW 42.17.190 on
matters directly affecting this chapter.

(((4))) (5)
No member of the commission may hold, seek, or campaign for elective or
appointive office while a member of the commission.

(6) A vacancy on
the commission shall be filled within thirty days of the vacancy by the
governor, with the consent of the senate, and the appointee shall serve for the
remaining term of his or her predecessor. A vacancy shall not impair the
powers of the remaining members to exercise all of the powers of the
commission.

(((5))) (7)
Three members of the commission shall constitute a quorum. The commission
shall elect its own chair and adopt its own rules of procedure in the manner
provided in chapter 34.05 RCW.

(((6)))
(8) Members shall be compensated in accordance with RCW 43.03.250 and in
addition shall be reimbursed for travel expenses incurred while engaged in the
business of the commission as provided in RCW 43.03.050 and 43.03.060. The
compensation provided pursuant to this section shall not be considered salary
for purposes of the provisions of any retirement system created pursuant to the
general laws of this state.

--- END ---