BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF
WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1. RCW 42.17.370 and 1995 c
397 s 17 are each amended to read as follows:

The commission is
empowered to:

(1) Adopt, promulgate,
amend, and rescind suitable administrative rules to carry out the policies and
purposes of this chapter, which rules shall be adopted under chapter 34.05
RCW. Any rule relating to campaign finance, political advertising, or related
forms that would otherwise take effect after June 30th of a general election
year shall take effect no earlier than the day following the general election
in that year;

(2) Appoint and set,
within the limits established by the committee on agency officials' salaries
under RCW 43.03.028, the compensation of an executive director who shall
perform such duties and have such powers as the commission may prescribe and
delegate to implement and enforce this chapter efficiently and effectively.
The commission shall not delegate its authority to adopt, amend, or rescind
rules nor shall it delegate authority to determine whether an actual violation
of this chapter has occurred or to assess penalties for such violations;

(3) Prepare and publish
such reports and technical studies as in its judgment will tend to promote the
purposes of this chapter, including reports and statistics concerning campaign
financing, lobbying, financial interests of elected officials, and enforcement
of this chapter;

(4) Make from time to
time, on its own motion, audits and field investigations;

(5) Make public the
time and date of any formal hearing set to determine whether a violation has
occurred, the question or questions to be considered, and the results thereof.
In order to prevent the creation of an appearance of bias the commission shall
not, however, make unsolicited disseminations of complaints before scheduling
the formal hearing, without a formal public records request;

(6) Administer oaths
and affirmations, issue subpoenas, and compel attendance, take evidence and
require the production of any books, papers, correspondence, memorandums, or
other records relevant or material for the purpose of any investigation
authorized under this chapter, or any other proceeding under this chapter;

(7) Adopt and
promulgate a code of fair campaign practices;

(8) Relieve, by rule,
candidates or political committees of obligations to comply with the provisions
of this chapter relating to election campaigns, if they have not received
contributions nor made expenditures in connection with any election campaign of
more than one thousand dollars;

(9) Adopt rules
prescribing reasonable requirements for keeping accounts of and reporting on a
quarterly basis costs incurred by state agencies, counties, cities, and other
municipalities and political subdivisions in preparing, publishing, and
distributing legislative information. The term "legislative
information," for the purposes of this subsection, means books, pamphlets,
reports, and other materials prepared, published, or distributed at substantial
cost, a substantial purpose of which is to influence the passage or defeat of
any legislation. The state auditor in his or her regular examination of each
agency under chapter 43.09 RCW shall review the rules, accounts, and reports
and make appropriate findings, comments, and recommendations in his or her
examination reports concerning those agencies;

(10) After hearing, by
order approved and ratified by a majority of the membership of the commission,
suspend or modify any of the reporting requirements of this chapter in a
particular case if it finds that literal application of this chapter works a manifestly
unreasonable hardship and if it also finds that the suspension or modification
will not frustrate the purposes of the chapter. The commission shall find that
a manifestly unreasonable hardship exists if reporting the name of an entity
required to be reported under RCW 42.17.241(1)(g)(ii) would be likely to
adversely affect the competitive position of any entity in which the person
filing the report or any member of his or her immediate family holds any
office, directorship, general partnership interest, or an ownership interest of
ten percent or more. Any suspension or modification shall be only to the
extent necessary to substantially relieve the hardship. The commission shall
act to suspend or modify any reporting requirements only if it determines that
facts exist that are clear and convincing proof of the findings required under
this section. Requests for renewals of reporting modifications may be heard in
a brief adjudicative proceeding as set forth in RCW 34.05.482 through 34.05.494
and in accordance with the standards established in this section. No initial
request may be heard in a brief adjudicative proceeding and no request for
renewal may be heard in a brief adjudicative proceeding if the initial request
was granted more than three years previously or if the applicant is holding an
office or position of employment different from the office or position held
when the initial request was granted. The commission shall adopt
administrative rules governing the proceedings. Any citizen has standing to
bring an action in Thurston county superior court to contest the propriety of
any order entered under this section within one year from the date of the entry
of the order; and

(11) Revise, at least
once every five years but no more often than every two years, the monetary
reporting thresholds and reporting code values of this chapter. The revisions
shall be only for the purpose of recognizing economic changes as reflected by
an inflationary index recommended by the office of financial management. The
revisions shall be guided by the change in the index for the period commencing
with the month of December preceding the last revision and concluding with the
month of December preceding the month the revision is adopted. As to each of
the three general categories of this chapter (reports of campaign finance,
reports of lobbyist activity, and reports of the financial affairs of elected
and appointed officials), the revisions shall equally affect all thresholds
within each category. Revisions shall be adopted as rules under chapter 34.05
RCW. The first revision authorized by this subsection shall reflect economic
changes from the time of the last legislative enactment affecting the
respective code or threshold through December 1985;

(12)
Develop and provide to filers a system for certification of reports required
under this chapter which are transmitted by facsimile or electronically to the
commission. Implementation of the program is contingent on the availability of
funds.

--- END ---