BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF
WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1. RCW 42.17.410 and 1982 c
147 s 18 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) In all
complaints in which the commission has jurisdiction, the commission must issue
charges within one hundred twenty days from the date the complaint was first
received, unless extended as provided in this subsection, or the complaint is
deemed dismissed with prejudice. An extension may be permitted if agreed to by
the complaining party, the accused, and the commission. The commission may
also grant a single sixty-day extension upon a showing of just cause.

(2)
Any legal action brought under the provisions of this chapter must be
commenced within five years after the date when the violation occurred.

--- END ---