BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF
WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1. RCW 18.64.246 and 1984 c
153 s 13 are each amended to read as follows:

To every
box, bottle, jar, tube or other container of a prescription which is dispensed
there shall be fixed a label bearing the name and address of the ((pharmacy
wherein the prescription is compounded, the corresponding serial number of the
prescription, the name of the prescriber, his directions, the name of the
medicine and the strength per unit dose, name of patient, date, the expiration
date, and initials of the licensed pharmacist who has compounded the
prescription, and)) dispensing pharmacy, the prescription number, the
name of the prescriber, the prescriber's directions, the name and strength of
the medication, the name of the patient, the date, and the expiration date. The
security of the cover or cap on every bottle or jar shall meet safety standards
((promulgated)) adopted by the state board of pharmacy((:
PROVIDED, That)). At the ((physician's)) prescriber's
request, the name and ((dosage)) strength of the ((drug)) medication
need not be shown. If the prescription is for a combination ((drug)) medication
product, the generic names of the ((drugs)) medications combined
or the trade name used by the manufacturer or distributor for the product shall
be noted on the label. The identification of the licensed pharmacist
responsible for each dispensing of medication must either be recorded in the
pharmacy's record system or on the prescription label. This section shall
not apply to the dispensing of ((medicines)) medications to
in-patients in hospitals.

--- END ---