BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF
WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1. RCW 79.91.080 and 1982
1st ex.s. c 21 s 55 are each amended to read as follows:

Any county or city or
the United States of America or any state agency desiring to locate, establish,
and construct a road or street over and across any aquatic lands, or wharf over
any tide or shore lands, belonging to the state, shall by resolution of the
legislative body of such county, or city council or other governing body of
such city, or proper agency of the United States of America or state agency,
cause to be filed with the department of natural resources a petition for a
right of way for such road or street or wharf in accordance with the provisions
of RCW 79.01.340.

The department may
grant the petition if it deems it in the best interest of the state and upon
payment for such right of way and any damages to the affected aquatic lands. The
department shall be consistent when calculating the charges for the use of a
right of way and for damages done to the affected aquatic lands, and shall not
apply a different standard to cities and counties than it applies to any state
or federal agency.

Sec. 2. RCW 79.91.100 and 1982
1st ex.s. c 21 s 57 are each amended to read as follows:

Counties,
cities, towns, and other municipalities shall have the right to construct
bridges and trestles across waterways heretofore or hereafter laid out under
the authority of the state of Washington, and over and across any tide or shore
lands and harbor areas of the state adjacent thereto over which the projected
line or lines of highway will run, if such bridges or trestles are constructed
in good faith for the purpose of being made a part of the constructed line of
such a highway, upon payment for any such right of way and upon payment for any
damages to those aquatic lands affected. The department shall not charge a
different rate to cities or counties for the use of a right of way or for
damages done to the affected aquatic lands than it applies to any state or
federal agency.

---
END ---