BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF
WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1. RCW 39.89.030 and 2001 c
212 s 3 are each amended to read as follows:

A local government may
finance public improvements using community revitalization financing subject to
the following conditions:

(1) The local
government adopts an ordinance designating an increment area within its
boundaries and specifying the public improvements proposed to be financed in
whole or in part with the use of community revitalization financing;

(2) The public
improvements proposed to be financed in whole or in part using community
revitalization financing are expected to encourage private development within
the increment area and to increase the fair market value of real property
within the increment area;

(3) Private development
that is anticipated to occur within the increment area, as a result of the
public improvements, will be consistent with the countywide planning policy
adopted by the county under RCW 36.70A.210 and the local government's
comprehensive plan and development regulations adopted under chapter 36.70A
RCW;

(4) Taxing districts,
in the aggregate, that levy at least seventy-five percent of the regular
property tax within which the increment area is located approves the community
revitalization financing of the project under RCW 39.89.050(1); and

(5) In an increment
area that includes any portion of a fire protection district as defined in
Title 52 RCW, the fire protection district must ((approve their
participation)) agree to participate in the community revitalization
financing of the project under chapter 212, Laws of 2001, for the project to
proceed. Approval by the fire protection district shall be considered as
part of the required participation by taxing districts under subsection (4) of
this section.

Sec. 2. RCW 39.89.040 and 2001 c
212 s 4 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) Public improvements
that are financed with community revitalization financing may be undertaken and
coordinated with other programs or efforts undertaken by the local government
and other taxing districts and may be funded in part from revenue sources other
than community revitalization financing.

(2) Public
improvements that are constructed by a private developer must meet all
applicable state and local laws.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
3. A new section is added
to chapter 39.89 RCW to read as follows:

(1) A local government
may issue revenue bonds to fund revenue‑generating public improvements,
or portions of public improvements, that are located within an increment area
and that it is authorized to provide or operate. Whenever revenue bonds are to
be issued, the legislative authority of the local government shall create or
have created a special fund or funds from which, along with any reserves
created pursuant to RCW 39.44.140, the principal and interest on these revenue
bonds shall exclusively be payable. The legislative authority of the local
government may obligate the local government to set aside and pay into the
special fund or funds a fixed proportion or a fixed amount of the revenues from
the public improvements that are funded by the revenue bonds. This amount or
proportion is a lien and charge against these revenues, subject only to
operating and maintenance expenses. The local government shall have due regard
for the cost of operation and maintenance of the public improvements that are
funded by the revenue bonds, and shall not set aside into the special fund or
funds a greater amount or proportion of the revenues that in its judgment will
be available over and above the cost of maintenance and operation and the
amount or proportion, if any, of the revenue previously pledged. The local
government may also provide that revenue bonds payable out of the same source
or sources of revenue may later be issued on a parity with any revenue bonds
being issued and sold.

(2) Revenue bonds issued
pursuant to this section are not an indebtedness of the local government
issuing the bonds, and the interest and principal on the bonds shall only be
payable from the revenues lawfully pledged to meet the principal and interest
requirements and any reserves created pursuant to RCW 39.44.140. The owner or
bearer of a revenue bond or any interest coupon issued pursuant to this section
shall not have any claim against the local government arising from the bond or
coupon except for payment from the revenues lawfully pledged to meet the
principal and interest requirements and any reserves created pursuant to RCW
39.44.140. The substance of the limitations included in this subsection shall
be plainly printed, written, or engraved on each bond issued pursuant to this
section.

(3) Revenue bonds with
a maturity in excess of thirty years shall not be issued. The legislative
authority of the local government shall by resolution determine for each
revenue bond issue the amount, date, form, terms, conditions, denominations,
maximum fixed or variable interest rate or rates, maturity or maturities,
redemption rights, registration privileges, manner of execution, manner of
sale, callable provisions, if any, and covenants including the refunding of
existing revenue bonds. Facsimile signatures may be used on the bonds and any
coupons. Refunding revenue bonds may be issued in the same manner as revenue
bonds are issued.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 4. RCW 39.89.901 (Expiration of chapter)
and 2001 c 212 s 29 are each repealed.

---
END ---