BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF
WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec.
1. The legislature finds
that the communities surrounding SeaTac Airport deal with unique impacts from
air takeoffs and landings that affect the livability of these communities. The
legislature also finds that these communities also deal with the impacts of
increased traffic, noise, and the continuing environmental degradation of air
and water quality.

Therefore, the
legislature creates the citizens committee for the enhancement of communities
surrounding SeaTac Airport, to be composed of citizens recommended by the
legislative representatives from the surrounding districts.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
2. A new section is added
to chapter 53.08 RCW to read as follows:

(1) A port district
that is countywide with a population greater than one million shall establish
by September 1, 2002, a citizens committee for the enhancement of communities
surrounding an airport that is owned and operated by the port.

(2) The citizens
committee shall consist of six members, who are appointed by the port
commission, from a list of recommendations received from the legislative
members of the legislative district that encompasses the airport. The
committee chair shall be designated by the port commission from among the
members of the citizens committee. Staff support for the citizens committee
shall be provided by the port commission.

(3) The members of the
citizens committee shall be representatives of communities that are either
wholly or partially situated within a five-mile radius of the airport.

(4) Committee members
shall serve as follows:

(a) Terms shall be
three years;

(b) Terms are staggered,
with the initial six appointees to serve terms as follows:

(i) Two appointee terms
expire in 2003;

(ii) Two appointee
terms expire in 2004; and

(iii) Two appointee
terms expire in 2005;

(c) At the end of a
term a member continues to serve until a successor is appointed; and

(d) A member who is
appointed to serve an unfinished term may be reappointed for one full term, or
until a successor is appointed.

(5) The citizens
committee shall meet regularly at the call of the chair. The port commission
shall appoint a liaison to the committee, and the liaison shall attend meetings
of the committee and report back to the port commission at least quarterly.

(6) Members of the
citizens committee may not receive compensation or other reimbursement for expenses.

(7) The committee
shall:

(a) Evaluate issues of
livability in the communities located in the area described in subsection (3)
of this section, and the unique impacts on livability in these communities
arising from their close proximity to the airport;

(b) Develop projects
designed to restore quality of life, including but not limited to park, school,
and transportation issues that affect livability in the communities; and

(c) Make
recommendations to the port commission for the funding of projects designed to
address transportation issues that affect livability in the communities.

(8) The port commission
shall:

(a) Consider the
recommendations of the committee;

(b) Make grants to fund
related projects recommended by the citizens committee; and

(c)
Identify in the annual budget an amount designated for the grants authorized
under this section. The amount designated shall include an amount equal to at
least one dollar for every takeoff and landing of an aircraft that occurs for
the most recent calendar year.

---
END ---