BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF
WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1. RCW 36.57A.110 and 1975
1st ex.s. c 270 s 21 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) The public
transportation benefit area shall have and exercise all rights with respect to
the construction, acquisition, maintenance, operation, extension, alteration,
repair, control and management of passenger transportation which any component
city ((shall have)) has been previously empowered to exercise,
and such powers shall not thereafter be exercised by such component cities
without the consent of the public transportation benefit area((: PROVIDED,
That any)). A city owning and operating a public transportation
system on July 1, 1975, may continue to operate such system within such
city until such system ((shall have)) has been acquired by the
public transportation benefit area, and a public transportation benefit
area may not acquire such system without the consent of the city council of
such city except as provided by subsection (2) of this section.

(2) If a public
transportation benefit area and a city both operate a public transportation
system within a county having a population over one hundred fifty thousand, the
county shall submit a ballot proposition asking whether the public
transportation benefit area shall acquire the city's public transportation
system. The county must hold an election on this question on or before
September 30, 2003. The costs of the election will be paid by the public
transportation benefit area.

(3) A ballot
proposition under subsection (2) of this section is subject to the following
conditions:

(a) The electorate
will be the voters of the public transportation benefit area and the city;

(b) The ballot
proposition will state that acquisition of the city's public transportation
system subjects the city to all obligations of the public transportation
benefit area, including taxes and other liabilities; and

(c) A simple
majority vote decides the ballot proposition.

(4) If the
electorate authorizes acquisition of the city's public transportation system:

(a) The city is
subject to all obligations of the public transportation benefit area, including
taxes and other liabilities;

(b) The public transportation
benefit area will:

(i) Acquire the
city's public transportation facilities and properties; and

(ii) Compensate the
city for the fair market value of the facilities and properties; and

(c) The
representatives of the public transportation benefit area's component cities
and counties must meet within ninety days of the election to review and change
the composition of the governing body, if the change is deemed appropriate.

(5) The acquisition
of a public transportation system under this section is not an annexation under
RCW 36.57A.140.

(6) If the
electorate votes against acquisition of the city's public transportation
system, effective January 1, 2004, the city will pay the public transportation
benefit area for the services rendered its citizens as required by RCW
36.57A.130. This obligation continues until such time as the public
transportation benefit area acquires the city's public transportation system.

Sec. 2. RCW 36.57A.130 and 1983
c 151 s 1 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) The
treasurer of the county in which a public transportation benefit area authority
is located shall be ex officio treasurer of the authority. In the case of a
multicounty public transportation benefit area the county treasurer of the
largest component county, by population, shall be the treasurer of the
authority. However, the authority, by resolution, and upon the approval of the
county treasurer, may designate some other person having experience in
financial or fiscal matters as treasurer of the authority. Such a treasurer
shall possess all of the powers, responsibilities, and duties the county
treasurer possesses for a public transportation benefit area authority related
to investing surplus authority funds. The authority may (and if the treasurer
is not a county treasurer, it shall) require a bond with a surety company
authorized to do business in the state of Washington in an amount and under the
terms and conditions the authority, by resolution, from time to time finds will
protect the authority against loss. The premium on any such bond shall be paid
by the authority.

(2) All
authority funds shall be paid to the treasurer and shall be disbursed by the
treasurer only on warrants issued by the county auditor, upon orders or
vouchers approved by the authority. However, the authority may, by resolution,
designate some person having experience in financial or fiscal matters, other
than the county auditor, as the auditor of the authority. Such an auditor
shall possess all of the powers, responsibilities, and duties that the county
auditor possesses for a public transportation benefit area authority related to
creating and maintaining funds, issuing warrants, and maintaining a record of
receipts and disbursements.

(3) The treasurer
shall establish a "transportation fund," into which shall be paid all
authority funds, and the treasurer shall maintain such special accounts as may
be created by the authority into which shall be placed all money as the
authority may, by resolution, direct.

(4) If the
treasurer of the authority is a treasurer of the county, all authority funds
shall be deposited with the county depositary under the same restrictions,
contracts, and security as provided for county depositaries. If the treasurer
of the authority is some other person, all funds shall be deposited in such
bank or banks authorized to do business in this state that have qualified for
insured deposits under any federal deposit insurance act as the authority, by
resolution, shall designate.

(5) An authority
may provide and require a reasonable bond of any other person handling moneys
or securities of the authority, but the authority shall pay the premium on the
bond.

(6)(a) The
county or counties and each city or town which is included in the authority
shall contribute such sums towards the expense for maintaining and operating
the public transportation system as shall be agreed upon between them. If a
public transportation benefit area and a city both operate a public
transportation system within a county with a population over one hundred fifty
thousand, the city will pay the public transportation benefit area:

(i) The average
subsidy per passenger of the public transportation benefit area multiplied by
the number of unlinked passenger trips made by that city's residents on the
public transportation benefit area transportation system; plus

(ii) The
depreciation expenses of the public transportation benefit area, divided by the
combined population of the public transportation benefit area and the city,
multiplied by the population of the city.

(b) Payment under
this subsection (6) must be made by May 1, 2005, and by May 1st of each
following year. Calculations under (a)(i) and (ii) of this subsection will be
based on the experience of the previous calendar year.

(7) The public
transportation benefit area will determine the amount under subsection
(6)(a)(i) of this section as provided in this subsection.

(a) The average
subsidy per passenger will be determined by:

(i) Subtracting the
fare revenues for all modes of transportation in the public transportation
benefit area from the sum total of operating expenses for those modes; and

(ii) Dividing by the
total number of unlinked trips for all modes of transportation in the public
transportation benefit area, as determined by the most recent national transit
data base figures for that system.

(b) The
number of unlinked passenger trips made by that city's residents will be
determined by the most recent on-board rider surveys performed biennially by an
independent consultant. The public transportation benefit area and the city
will equally share the cost of the survey.

---
END ---