BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF
WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec.
1. A new section is added
to chapter 43.20 RCW to read as follows:

(1) The legislature
finds that the public health interest requires that there be uniform state food
service rules for retail food facilities to assure that food will be pure,
safe, and unadulterated and to facilitate effective training of food service
handlers. The legislature also finds that the federal food and drug
administration has recently developed an updated model food code to serve as a
guide to states to provide protection of consumers and consistency among states
with regard to food safety and food service. In addition, the legislature
finds that chapter 246-215 WAC has not been comprehensively reviewed and
updated since 1992.

(2) Effective July 1,
2004, the state board of health has the sole rule-making authority to adopt
food service rules for retail food facilities, and the standards and rules
adopted by and interpretations of the state board of health shall be exclusive
for food service at retail food facilities. After June 30, 2004, local health
departments shall administer the state food service rules and interpretations,
except as provided for in subsection (3) of this section.

(3) This section does
not prohibit a local board of health from adopting a temporary deviation from
the state food service rules for a limited period of time to respond to an
emergency that threatens the public health or safety of the citizens of its
community. The state board of health shall review the local emergency
administrative action within sixty days after the action is taken to determine
if the state board of health should adopt a statewide rule under the
administrative procedure act, chapter 34.05 RCW.

(4) By
December 1, 2003, the state board of health shall adopt updated food service
rules. Periodically after July 1, 2004, the state board of health shall review
and update the rules in consultation with local boards of health and the
regulated community.

--- END ---