BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF
WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec.
1. Washington state is
experiencing a critical shortage of qualified, competent health care workers.
To safeguard the health, efficiency, and general well-being of health care
workers and promote patient safety and quality of care, the legislature finds,
as a matter of public policy, that required overtime work should be limited in
order to ensure the public will continue to receive safe quality care.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
2. The definitions in this
section apply throughout this section and sections 3 and 4 of this act unless
the context clearly requires otherwise.

(1)
"Employee" means an individual employed by a health care facility who
is involved in direct patient care activities or clinical services and receives
an hourly wage, but does not include a physician.

(2)
"Employer" means an individual, partnership, association,
corporation, state institution, political subdivision of the state, or person
or group of persons, acting directly or indirectly in the interest of a health
care facility.

(3) "Health care
facility" means hospices licensed under chapter 70.127 RCW, hospitals
licensed under chapter 70.41 RCW, rural health care facilities as defined in
RCW 70.175.020, and psychiatric hospitals licensed under chapter 71.12 RCW, and
includes such facilities if owned and operated by a political subdivision or
instrumentality of the state. If a nursing home regulated under chapter 18.51
RCW or a home health agency regulated under chapter 70.127 RCW is operating
under the license of a health care facility, the nursing home or home health
agency is considered part of the health care facility for the purposes of this
subsection.

(4)
"Overtime" means the hours worked in excess of any of the following:

(a) An agreed upon,
predetermined, regularly scheduled shift;

(b) Twelve hours in a
twenty-four-hour period; or

(c) Eighty hours in a
consecutive fourteen-day period.

(5) "On-call
time" means time spent by an employee who is not working on the premises
of the place of employment but who is compensated for availability or who, as a
condition of employment, has agreed to be available to return to the premises
of the place of employment on short notice if the need arises.

(6) "Reasonable
efforts" means that the employer does all of the following but is unable
to obtain staffing coverage:

(a) Seeks individuals
to volunteer to work extra time from all available qualified staff who are
working;

(b) Contacts qualified
employees who have made themselves available to work extra time;

(c) Seeks the use of
per diem staff; and

(d) Seeks personnel
from a contracted temporary agency when such staffing is permitted by law or an
applicable collective bargaining agreement.

(7) "Unforeseeable
emergent circumstance" means (a) any unforeseen declared national, state,
or municipal emergency; (b) when a health care facility disaster plan is
activated; or (c) any unforeseen disaster or other catastrophic event which
substantially affects or increases the need for health care services.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
3. (1) No employee of a
health care facility may be required to work overtime. This policy is a
minimum employment standard and any requirement contained in a contract, agreement,
or understanding that is less favorable to an employee than this minimum
employment standard is void.

(2) Compelling or
attempting to compel an employee to work overtime is contrary to public policy
and a violation of this section. The acceptance by any employee of overtime
work is strictly voluntary, and the refusal of an employee to accept such
overtime work is not grounds for discrimination, dismissal, discharge, or any
other penalty, threat of reports for discipline, or employment decision adverse
to the employee.

(3) This section does
not apply to work that occurs:

(a) Because of any
unforeseeable emergent circumstance;

(b) During prescheduled
on‑call time if, as of the effective date of this section, such
prescheduled on-call time was a customary and long-standing practice in the
unit or department of the health care facility; or

(c) Because of an
unpredictable and unavoidable occurrence at unscheduled intervals relating to
health care delivery that requires immediate action if the employer shows that
the employer has exhausted reasonable efforts to obtain staffing. An employer
has not used reasonable efforts if overtime work is used to fill vacancies
resulting from chronic staff shortages.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
4. (1) The department of
labor and industries shall investigate complaints of violations of section 3 of
this act. A violation of section 3 of this act is a class 1 civil infraction
in accordance with chapter 7.80 RCW, except that the maximum penalty is one
thousand dollars for each infraction up to three infractions. If there are
four or more violations of section 3 of this act for a health care facility,
the employer is subject to a fine of two thousand five hundred dollars for the
fourth violation, and five thousand dollars for each subsequent violation. The
department of labor and industries is authorized to issue and enforce civil
infractions according to chapter 7.80 RCW.

NEW SECTION.
Sec. 5. Sections 2 through 4 of
this act are each added to chapter 49.28 RCW.

---
END ---