BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF
WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1. RCW 10.31.100 and 2000 c
119 s 4 are each amended to read as follows:

A police officer having
probable cause to believe that a person has committed or is committing a felony
shall have the authority to arrest the person without a warrant. A police
officer may arrest a person without a warrant for committing a misdemeanor or
gross misdemeanor only when the offense is committed in the presence of the
officer, except as provided in subsections (1) through (10) of this section.

(1) Any police officer
having probable cause to believe that a person has committed or is committing a
misdemeanor or gross misdemeanor, involving physical harm or threats of harm to
any person or property or the unlawful taking of property or involving the use
or possession of cannabis, or involving the acquisition, possession, or
consumption of alcohol by a person under the age of twenty-one years under RCW
66.44.270, or involving criminal trespass under RCW 9A.52.070 or 9A.52.080,
shall have the authority to arrest the person.

(2) A police officer
shall arrest and take into custody, pending release on bail, personal
recognizance, or court order, a person without a warrant when the officer has
probable cause to believe that:

(a) An order has been
issued of which the person has knowledge under RCW 26.44.063, or chapter 10.99,
26.09, 26.10, 26.26, 26.50, or 74.34 RCW restraining the person and the person
has violated the terms of the order restraining the person from acts or threats
of violence, or restraining the person from going onto the grounds of or
entering a residence, workplace, school, or day care, or prohibiting the person
from knowingly coming within, or knowingly remaining within, a specified
distance of a location or, in the case of an order issued under RCW 26.44.063,
imposing any other restrictions or conditions upon the person; or

(b) A foreign
protection order, as defined in RCW 26.52.010, has been issued of which the
person under restraint has knowledge and the person under restraint has violated
a provision of the foreign protection order prohibiting the person under
restraint from contacting or communicating with another person, or excluding
the person under restraint from a residence, workplace, school, or day care, or
prohibiting the person from knowingly coming within, or knowingly remaining
within, a specified distance of a location, or a violation of any provision for
which the foreign protection order specifically indicates that a violation will
be a crime; or

(c) The person is sixteen
years or older and within the preceding four hours has assaulted a family or
household member as defined in RCW 10.99.020 and the officer believes: (i) A
felonious assault has occurred; (ii) an assault has occurred which has resulted
in bodily injury to the victim, whether the injury is observable by the
responding officer or not; or (iii) that any physical action has occurred which
was intended to cause another person reasonably to fear imminent serious bodily
injury or death. Bodily injury means physical pain, illness, or an impairment
of physical condition. When the officer has probable cause to believe that
family or household members have assaulted each other, the officer is not
required to arrest both persons. The officer shall arrest the person whom the
officer believes to be the primary physical aggressor. In making this
determination, the officer shall make every reasonable effort to consider: (i)
The intent to protect victims of domestic violence under RCW 10.99.010; (ii)
the comparative extent of injuries inflicted or serious threats creating fear
of physical injury; and (iii) the history of domestic violence between the
persons involved.

(3) Any police officer
having probable cause to believe that a person has committed or is committing a
violation of any of the following traffic laws shall have the authority to
arrest the person:

(a) RCW 46.52.010,
relating to duty on striking an unattended car or other property;

(b) RCW 46.52.020,
relating to duty in case of injury to or death of a person or damage to an
attended vehicle;

(c) RCW 46.61.500 or
46.61.530, relating to reckless driving or racing of vehicles;

(d) RCW 46.61.502 or
46.61.504, relating to persons under the influence of intoxicating liquor or
drugs;

(e) RCW 46.20.342,
relating to driving a motor vehicle while operator's license is suspended or
revoked;

(f) RCW 46.61.5249,
relating to operating a motor vehicle in a negligent manner.

(4) A ((law
enforcement)) police officer investigating at the scene of a motor
vehicle accident may arrest the driver of a motor vehicle involved in the
accident if the officer has probable cause to believe that the driver has
committed in connection with the accident a violation of any traffic law or
regulation.

(5) A police officer
investigating at the scene of an accident involving a vessel regulated under
chapter 79A.60 RCW may arrest the operator of a vessel involved in the accident
if the officer has probable cause to believe that the operator of the vessel
has committed a violation of chapter 79A.60 RCW in connection with the
accident. In addition, any police officer having probable cause to believe
that a person has committed or is committing a violation of RCW 79A.60.040
shall have the authority to arrest the person.

(6) ((An)) A
police officer may act upon the request of a law enforcement officer in
whose presence a traffic infraction was committed, to stop, detain, arrest, or
issue a notice of traffic infraction to the driver who is believed to have
committed the infraction. The request by the witnessing officer shall give an
officer the authority to take appropriate action under the laws of the state of
Washington.

(7) Any police officer
having probable cause to believe that a person has committed or is committing
any act of indecent exposure, as defined in RCW 9A.88.010, may arrest the
person.

(8) A police officer
may arrest and take into custody, pending release on bail, personal
recognizance, or court order, a person without a warrant when the officer has
probable cause to believe that an order has been issued of which the person has
knowledge under chapter 10.14 RCW and the person has violated the terms of that
order.

(9) Any police officer
having probable cause to believe that a person has, within twenty-four hours of
the alleged violation, committed a violation of RCW 9A.50.020 may arrest such
person.

(10) A police officer
having probable cause to believe that a person illegally possesses or illegally
has possessed a firearm or other dangerous weapon on private or public elementary
or secondary school premises shall have the authority to arrest the person.

For purposes of this
subsection, the term "firearm" has the meaning defined in RCW
9.41.010 and the term "dangerous weapon" has the meaning defined in
RCW 9.41.250 and 9.41.280(1) (c) through (e).

(11) Except as
specifically provided in subsections (2), (3), (4), and (6) of this section,
nothing in this section extends or otherwise affects the powers of arrest
prescribed in Title 46 RCW.

(12) No police officer
may be held criminally or civilly liable for making an arrest pursuant to RCW
10.31.100 (2) or (8) if the police officer acts in good faith and without
malice.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
2. A new section is added
to chapter 79A.60 RCW to read as follows:

A law
enforcement officer investigating at the scene of an accident involving a
vessel regulated under this chapter may issue a notice of infraction to the
operator of a vessel involved in the accident if the officer has reasonable
cause to believe that the operator of the vessel has committed an infraction in
connection with the accident.

---
END ---