BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF
WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1. RCW 9A.56.010 and 1999 c
143 s 36 are each amended to read as follows:

The following
definitions are applicable in this chapter unless the context otherwise
requires:

(1) "Access device"
means any card, plate, code, account number, or other means of account access
that can be used alone or in conjunction with another access device to obtain
money, goods, services, or anything else of value, or that can be used to
initiate a transfer of funds, other than a transfer originated solely by paper
instrument;

(2) "Appropriate
lost or misdelivered property or services" means obtaining or exerting
control over the property or services of another which the actor knows to have
been lost or mislaid, or to have been delivered under a mistake as to identity
of the recipient or as to the nature or amount of the property;

(3) "Beverage
crate" means a plastic or metal box-like container used by a manufacturer
or distributor in the transportation or distribution of individually packaged
beverages to retail outlets, and affixed with language stating "property
of . . . . .," "owned by
. . . . .," or other markings or words identifying
ownership;

(4) "By color or
aid of deception" means that the deception operated to bring about the
obtaining of the property or services; it is not necessary that deception be
the sole means of obtaining the property or services;

(5)
"Deception" occurs when an actor knowingly:

(a) Creates or confirms
another's false impression which the actor knows to be false; or

(b) Fails to correct
another's impression which the actor previously has created or confirmed; or

(c) Prevents another
from acquiring information material to the disposition of the property
involved; or

(d) Transfers or
encumbers property without disclosing a lien, adverse claim, or other legal
impediment to the enjoyment of the property, whether that impediment is or is
not valid, or is or is not a matter of official record; or

(e) Promises
performance which the actor does not intend to perform or knows will not be
performed.

(6) "Deprive"
in addition to its common meaning means to make unauthorized use or an
unauthorized copy of records, information, data, trade secrets, or computer
programs;

(7) "Merchandise
pallet" means a wood or plastic carrier designed and manufactured as an
item on which products can be placed before or during transport to retail
outlets, manufacturers, or contractors, and affixed with language stating
"property of . . .," "owned
by . . .," or other markings or words identifying
ownership;

(8) "Obtain
control over" in addition to its common meaning, means:

(a) In relation to
property, to bring about a transfer or purported transfer to the obtainer or
another of a legally recognized interest in the property; or

(b) In relation to
labor or service, to secure performance thereof for the benefits of the
obtainer or another;

(9) "Owner"
means a person, other than the actor, who has possession of or any other
interest in the property or services involved, and without whose consent the
actor has no authority to exert control over the property or services;

(10) "Parking
area" means a parking lot or other property provided by retailers for use
by a customer for parking an automobile or other vehicle;

(11)
"Receive" includes, but is not limited to, acquiring title,
possession, control, or a security interest, or any other interest in the
property;

(12)
"Services" includes, but is not limited to, labor, professional
services, transportation services, electronic computer services, the supplying
of hotel accommodations, restaurant services, entertainment, the supplying of
equipment for use, and the supplying of commodities of a public utility nature such
as gas, electricity, steam, and water;

(13) "Shopping
cart" means a basket mounted on wheels or similar container generally used
in a retail establishment by a customer for the purpose of transporting goods
of any kind;

(14) "Stolen"
means obtained by theft, robbery, or extortion;

(15) "Subscription
television service" means cable or encrypted video and related audio and
data services intended for viewing on a home television by authorized members
of the public only, who have agreed to pay a fee for the service. Subscription
services include but are not limited to those video services presently
delivered by coaxial cable, fiber optic cable, terrestrial microwave,
television broadcast, and satellite transmission;

(16)
"Telecommunication device" means (a) any type of instrument, device,
machine, or equipment that is capable of transmitting or receiving telephonic
or electronic communications; or (b) any part of such an instrument, device,
machine, or equipment, or any computer circuit, computer chip, electronic
mechanism, or other component, that is capable of facilitating the transmission
or reception of telephonic or electronic communications;

(17)
"Telecommunication service" includes any service other than
subscription television service provided for a charge or compensation to
facilitate the transmission, transfer, or reception of a telephonic
communication or an electronic communication;

(18) Value. (a)
"Value" means the market value of the property or services at the
time and in the approximate area of the criminal act.

(b) Whether or not they
have been issued or delivered, written instruments, except those having a
readily ascertained market value, shall be evaluated as follows:

(i) The value of an
instrument constituting an evidence of debt, such as a check, draft, or
promissory note, shall be deemed the amount due or collectible thereon or
thereby, that figure ordinarily being the face amount of the indebtedness less
any portion thereof which has been satisfied;

(ii) The value of a
ticket or equivalent instrument which evidences a right to receive
transportation, entertainment, or other service shall be deemed the price
stated thereon, if any; and if no price is stated thereon, the value shall be
deemed the price of such ticket or equivalent instrument which the issuer
charged the general public;

(iii) The value of any
other instrument that creates, releases, discharges, or otherwise affects any
valuable legal right, privilege, or obligation shall be deemed the greatest
amount of economic loss which the owner of the instrument might reasonably
suffer by virtue of the loss of the instrument.

(c) Whenever any series
of transactions which constitute theft, would, when considered separately,
constitute theft in the third degree because of value, and said series of
transactions are a part of a criminal episode or a common scheme or
plan, then the transactions may be aggregated in one count and the sum of the
value of all said transactions shall be the value considered in determining the
degree of theft involved.

For purposes of this
subsection, "criminal episode" means a series of thefts committed by
the same person from one or more mercantile establishments on three or more
occasions within a five-day period.

(d) Whenever any person
is charged with possessing stolen property and such person has unlawfully in
his possession at the same time the stolen property of more than one person,
then the stolen property possessed may be aggregated in one count and the sum of
the value of all said stolen property shall be the value considered in
determining the degree of theft involved.

(e) Property or
services having value that cannot be ascertained pursuant to the standards set
forth above shall be deemed to be of a value not exceeding two hundred and
fifty dollars;

(19) "Wrongfully
obtains" or "exerts unauthorized control" means:

(a) To take the
property or services of another;

(b) Having any property
or services in one's possession, custody or control as bailee, factor, lessee,
pledgee, renter, servant, attorney, agent, employee, trustee, executor,
administrator, guardian, or officer of any person, estate, association, or
corporation, or as a public officer, or person authorized by agreement or
competent authority to take or hold such possession, custody, or control, to
secrete, withhold, or appropriate the same to his or her own use or to the use
of any person other than the true owner or person entitled thereto; or

(c) Having
any property or services in one's possession, custody, or control as partner,
to secrete, withhold, or appropriate the same to his or her use or to the use
of any person other than the true owner or person entitled thereto, where the
use is unauthorized by the partnership agreement.

--- END ---