BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF
WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1. RCW 90.03.383 and 1991 c
350 s 1 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) The legislature
recognizes the value of interties for improving the reliability of public water
systems, enhancing their management, and more efficiently utilizing the
increasingly limited resource. Given the continued growth in the most populous
areas of the state, the increased complexity of public water supply management,
and the trend toward regional planning and regional solutions to resource
issues, interconnections of public water systems through interties provide a
valuable tool to ensure reliable public water supplies for the citizens of the
state. Public water systems have been encouraged in the past to utilize
interties to achieve public health and resource management objectives. The
legislature finds that it is in the public interest to recognize interties
existing and in use as of January 1, 1991, and to have associated water rights
modified by the department of ecology to reflect current use of water through
those interties, pursuant to subsection (3) of this section. The legislature
further finds it in the public interest to develop a coordinated process to
review proposals for interties commencing use after January 1, 1991.

(2) For the purposes of
this section, the following definitions shall apply:

(a)
"Interties" are interconnections between public water systems
permitting exchange, acquisition, or delivery of water between those
systems for other than emergency supply purposes, where such exchange or
delivery is within established instantaneous and annual withdrawal rates
specified in the systems' existing water right permits or certificates, or
contained in claims filed pursuant to chapter 90.14 RCW, and which results in
better management of public water supply consistent with existing rights and
obligations. Interties include interconnections between public water systems
permitting exchange, acquisition, or delivery of water to serve as
primary or secondary sources of supply, ((but do not include development of
new sources of supply to meet future demand)) and may include use of
inchoate amounts of water from existing sources of supply.

(b) "Service
area" is the area designated in a water system plan or a coordinated water
system plan pursuant to chapter 43.20 or 70.116 RCW respectively. When a
public water system does not have a designated service area subject to the
approval process of those chapters, the service area shall be the designated
place of use contained in the water right permit or certificate, or contained
in the claim filed pursuant to chapter 90.14 RCW.

(3) Public water
systems with interties existing and in use as of January 1, 1991, or that have
received written approval from the department of health prior to that date,
shall file written notice of those interties with the department of health and
the department of ecology. The notice may be incorporated into the public
water system's five-year update of its water system plan, but shall be filed no
later than June 30, 1996. The notice shall identify the location of the
intertie; the dates of its first use; the purpose, capacity, and current use;
the intertie agreement of the parties and the service areas assigned; and other
information reasonably necessary to modify the water right permit. Notwithstanding
the provisions of RCW 90.03.380 and 90.44.100, for public water systems with
interties existing and in use as of January 1, 1991, the department of ecology,
upon receipt of notice meeting the requirements of this subsection, shall, as
soon as practicable, modify the place of use descriptions in the water right
permits, certificates, or claims to reflect the actual use through such
interties, provided that the place of use is within service area designations
established in a water system plan approved pursuant to chapter 43.20 RCW, or a
coordinated water system plan approved pursuant to chapter 70.116 RCW, and
further provided that the water used is within the instantaneous and annual
withdrawal rates specified in the water right permit and that no outstanding
complaints of impairment to existing water rights have been filed with the
department of ecology prior to September 1, 1991. Where such complaints of
impairment have been received, the department of ecology shall make all
reasonable efforts to resolve them in a timely manner through agreement of the
parties or through available administrative remedies.

(4) Notwithstanding the
provisions of RCW 90.03.380 and 90.44.100, exchange or delivery of water
through interties commencing use after January 1, 1991, shall be permitted when
the intertie improves overall system reliability, enhances the manageability of
the systems, provides opportunities for conjunctive use, or delays or avoids
the need to develop new water sources, and otherwise meets the requirements of
this section, provided that each public water system's water use shall not
exceed the instantaneous or annual withdrawal rate specified in its water right
authorization, shall not adversely affect existing water rights, and shall not
be inconsistent with state-approved plans such as water system plans or other
plans which include specific proposals for construction of interties.
Interties commencing use after January 1, 1991, shall not be inconsistent with
regional water resource plans developed pursuant to chapter 90.54 RCW. This
section shall not be interpreted to preclude the use of an intertie to mitigate
adverse impacts to existing water rights or instream flows.

(5) For public water
systems subject to the approval process of chapter 43.20 RCW or chapter 70.116
RCW, proposals for interties commencing use after January 1, 1991, shall be
incorporated into water system plans pursuant to chapter 43.20 RCW or
coordinated water system plans pursuant to chapter 70.116 RCW and submitted to the
department of health and the department of ecology for review and approval as
provided for in subsections (5) through (9) of this section. The plan shall
state how the proposed intertie will improve overall system reliability,
enhance the manageability of the systems, provide opportunities for conjunctive
use, or delay or avoid the need to develop new water sources.

(6) The department of
health shall be responsible for review and approval of proposals for new
interties. In its review the department of health shall determine whether the
intertie satisfies the criteria of subsection (4) of this section, with the
exception of water rights considerations, which are the responsibility of the
department of ecology, and shall determine whether the intertie is necessary to
address emergent public health or safety concerns associated with public water
supply.

(7) If the intertie is
determined by the department of health to be necessary to address emergent
public health or safety concerns associated with public water supply, the
public water system shall amend its water system plan as required and shall
file an application with the department of ecology to change its existing water
right to reflect the proposed use of the water as described in the approved water
system plan. The department of ecology shall process the application for
change pursuant to RCW 90.03.380 or 90.44.100 as appropriate, except that,
notwithstanding the requirements of those sections regarding notice and protest
periods, applicants shall be required to publish notice one time, and the
comment period shall be fifteen days from the date of publication of the
notice. Within sixty days of receiving the application, the department of
ecology shall issue findings and advise the department of health if existing
water rights are determined to be adversely affected. If no determination is
provided by the department of ecology within the sixty-day period, the
department of health shall proceed as if existing rights are not adversely
affected by the proposed intertie. The department of ecology may obtain an
extension of the sixty-day period by submitting written notice to the
department of health and to the applicant indicating a definite date by which
its determination will be made. No additional extensions shall be granted, and
in no event shall the total review period for the department of ecology exceed
one hundred eighty days.

(8) If the department
of health determines the proposed intertie appears to meet the requirements of
subsection (4) of this section but is not necessary to address emergent public
health or safety concerns associated with public water supply, the department
of health shall instruct the applicant to submit to the department of ecology
an application for change to the underlying water right or claim as necessary
to reflect the new place of use. The department of ecology shall consider the
applications pursuant to the provisions of RCW 90.03.380 and 90.44.100 as
appropriate. If in its review of proposed interties and associated water
rights the department of ecology determines that additional information is
required to act on the application, the department may request applicants to
provide information necessary for its decision, consistent with agency rules
and written guidelines. Parties disagreeing with the decision of the
department of ecology on the application for change in place of use may appeal
the decision to the pollution control hearings board.

(9) The department of
health may approve plans containing intertie proposals prior to the department
of ecology's decision on the water right application for change in place of
use. However, notwithstanding such approval, construction work on the intertie
shall not begin until the department of ecology issues the appropriate water
right document to the applicant consistent with the approved plan.

(10) An intertie
installed or commencing after the effective date of this section that is used
to deliver a nonemergency primary supply of water to a receiving system having
fewer than one thousand connections may not be terminated until the earlier
of: The date that replacement water is available for delivery to or use by the
receiving system, or five years following the date of notice from the
delivering water system that delivery of primary water supply to the receiving
system shall be terminated.

(11) Any intertie
installed or commencing use specifically in response to a water emergency
declared by the department of health under chapter 43.70 RCW may be terminated
upon cancellation by the department of health of the emergency declaration.

(12) A
public water system commencing receipt of a primary supply of water through an
intertie after the effective date of this section must initiate conservation
measures that will result in the receiving system meeting or exceeding current
department of health conservation guidelines.

--- END ---