BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF
WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1. RCW 28A.600.200 and 1990
c 33 s 502 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) Each school
district board of directors is hereby granted and shall exercise the authority
to control, supervise, and regulate the conduct of interschool athletic
activities and other interschool extracurricular activities of an athletic,
cultural, social, or recreational nature for students of the district.
A board of directors may delegate control, supervision, and regulation
of any such activity to the Washington Interscholastic Activities Association
or any other voluntary nonprofit entity and compensate such entity for services
provided, subject to the following conditions:

(((1))) (a)
The voluntary nonprofit entity shall submit an annual report to the state board
of education of student appeal determinations, assets, and financial receipts
and disbursements at such time and in such detail as the state board shall
establish by rule;

(((2))) (b)
The voluntary nonprofit entity shall not discriminate in connection with
employment or membership upon its governing board, or otherwise in connection
with any function it performs, on the basis of race, creed, national origin,
sex, or marital status;

(((3))) (c)
Any rules and policies applied by the voluntary nonprofit entity which govern
student participation in any interschool activity shall be written and subject
to the annual review and approval of the state board of education at such time
as it shall establish;

(((4))) (d)
All amendments and repeals of such rules and policies shall be subject to the
review and approval of the state board; and

(((5))) (e)
Such rules and policies shall provide for notice of the reasons and a fair
opportunity to contest such reasons prior to a final determination to reject a
student's request to participate in or to continue in an interschool activity.
Any such decision shall be considered a decision of the school district
conducting the activity in which the student seeks to participate or was
participating and may be appealed pursuant to RCW 28A.645.010 through
28A.645.030.

(2)
Prior to the first practice for participation in interscholastic athletics in a
middle level school, and prior to the first practice for participation in a
high school, a student must undergo a thorough physical examination and be
approved for either middle level or high school athletic competition, or both,
by a health professional licensed to perform a physical examination. The
physical examination must be performed by a physician, an osteopathic
physician, a physician's assistant, a chiropractor, an advanced registered
nurse practitioner, a naturopathic physician, or other health care
professional, acting within the scope of his or her license.

--- END ---