BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF
WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec.
1. This chapter shall be
known and cited as the "simplified sales and use tax administration
act."

NEW SECTION. Sec.
2. The definitions in this
section apply throughout this chapter unless the context clearly requires
otherwise.

(1)
"Agreement" means the streamlined sales and use tax agreement as
adopted.

(2) "Certified
automated system" means software certified jointly by the states that are
signatories to the agreement to calculate the tax imposed by each jurisdiction
on a transaction, determine the amount of tax to remit to the appropriate state,
and maintain a record of the transaction.

(3) "Certified
service provider" means an agent certified jointly by the states that are
signatories to the agreement to perform all of the seller's sales tax
functions.

(4) "Person"
means an individual, trust, estate, fiduciary, partnership, limited liability
company, limited liability partnership, corporation, or any other legal entity.

(5) "Sales
tax" means the tax levied under chapter 82.08 RCW.

(6) "Seller"
means any person making sales, leases, or rentals of personal property or
services.

(7) "State"
means any state of the United States and the District of Columbia.

(8) "Use tax"
means the tax levied under chapter 82.12 RCW.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
3. The legislature finds
that a simplified sales and use tax system will reduce and over time eliminate
the burden and cost for all vendors to collect this state's sales and use tax.
The legislature further finds that this state should participate in multistate
discussions to review or amend the terms of the agreement to simplify and
modernize sales and use tax administration in order to substantially reduce the
burden of tax compliance for all sellers and for all types of commerce.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
4. For the purposes of
reviewing or amending the agreement embodying the simplification requirements
in section 7 of this act, the state shall enter into multistate discussions.
For purposes of these discussions, the state shall be represented by the
department. The department shall regularly consult with an advisory group
composed of one member from the house of representatives appointed by the
speaker of the house of representatives; one member of the senate appointed by
the president of the senate; representatives of retailers, including those
selling via mail, telephone, and the internet; representatives of large and
small businesses; and representatives of counties and cities.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
5. The department shall
enter into the streamlined sales and use tax agreement with one or more states
to simplify and modernize sales and use tax administration in order to
substantially reduce the burden of tax compliance for all sellers and for all
types of commerce. In furtherance of the agreement, the department may act
jointly with other states that are members of the agreement to establish
standards for certification of a certified service provider and certified
automated system and establish performance standards for multistate sellers.
The department is further authorized to take other actions reasonably required
to implement this chapter. Other actions authorized by this section include,
but are not limited to, the adoption of rules and the joint procurement, with
other member states, of goods and services in furtherance of the cooperative
agreement. The department, or the department's designee, may represent this
state before the other states that are signatories to the agreement.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
6. No provision of the
agreement authorized by this chapter in whole or part invalidates or amends any
provision of the law of this state. Adoption of the agreement by this state
does not amend or modify any law of this state. Implementation of any condition
of the agreement in this state, whether adopted before, at, or after membership
of this state in the agreement, must be by the action of this state.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
7. The department shall not
enter into the streamlined sales and use tax agreement unless the agreement
requires each state to abide by the requirements in this section.

(1) The agreement must
set restrictions to limit over time the number of state rates.

(2) The agreement must
establish uniform standards for:

(a) The sourcing of
transactions to taxing jurisdictions;

(b) The administration
of exempt sales; and

(c) Sales and use tax
returns and remittances.

(3) The agreement must
provide a central, electronic registration system that allows a seller to register
to collect and remit sales and use taxes for all signatory states.

(4) The agreement must
provide that registration with the central registration system and the
collection of sales and use taxes in the signatory states will not be used as a
factor in determining whether the seller has nexus with a state for any tax.

(5) The agreement must
provide for reduction of the burdens of complying with local sales and use
taxes by:

(a) Restricting
variances between the state and local tax bases;

(b) Requiring states to
administer any sales and use taxes levied by local jurisdictions within the
state so that sellers collecting and remitting these taxes will not have to
register or file returns with, remit funds to, or be subject to independent audits
from local taxing jurisdictions;

(c) Restricting the
frequency of changes in the local sales and use tax rates and setting effective
dates for the application of local jurisdictional boundary changes to local
sales and use taxes; and

(d) Providing notice of
changes in local sales and use tax rates and of changes in the boundaries of
local taxing jurisdictions.

(6) The agreement must
outline any monetary allowances that are to be provided by the states to
sellers or certified service providers. The agreement must allow for a joint
public and private sector study of the compliance cost on sellers and certified
service providers to collect sales and use taxes for state and local
governments under various levels of complexity to be completed by July 1, 2002.

(7) The agreement must
require each state to certify compliance with the terms of the agreement before
joining and to maintain compliance, under the laws of the member state, with
all provisions of the agreement while a member.

(8) The agreement must
require each state to adopt a uniform policy for certified service providers
that protects the privacy of consumers and maintains the confidentiality of tax
information.

(9) The agreement must
provide for the appointment of an advisory council of private sector
representatives and an advisory council of nonmember state representatives to
consult with in the administration of the agreement.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
8. The agreement authorized
by this chapter is an accord among individual cooperating sovereigns in
furtherance of their governmental functions. The agreement provides a
mechanism among the member states to establish and maintain a cooperative,
simplified system for the application and administration of sales and use taxes
under the duly adopted law of each member state.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
9. (1) The agreement
authorized by this chapter binds and inures only to the benefit of this state
and the other member states. No person, other than a member state, is an
intended beneficiary of the agreement. Any benefit to a person other than a
state is established by the law of this state and the other member states and
not by the terms of the agreement.

(2) Consistent with
subsection (1) of this section, no person has any cause of action or defense
under the agreement or by virtue of this state's approval of the agreement. No
person may challenge, in any action brought under any provision of law, any
action or inaction by any department, agency, other instrumentality of this
state, or any political subdivision of this state on the ground that the action
or inaction is inconsistent with the agreement.

(3) No law of this
state, or the application thereof, may be declared invalid as to any person or
circumstance on the ground that the provision or application is inconsistent
with the agreement.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
10. (1) A certified service
provider is the agent of a seller, with whom the certified service provider has
contracted, for the collection and remittance of sales and use taxes. As the
seller's agent, the certified service provider is liable for sales and use tax
due each member state on all sales transactions it processes for the seller
except as set out in this section. A seller that contracts with a certified
service provider is not liable to the state for sales or use tax due on
transactions processed by the certified service provider unless the seller
misrepresented the type of items it sells or committed fraud. In the absence
of probable cause to believe that the seller has committed fraud or made a
material misrepresentation, the seller is not subject to audit on the
transactions processed by the certified service provider. A seller is subject
to audit for transactions not processed by the certified service provider. The
member states acting jointly may perform a system check of the seller and
review the seller's procedures to determine if the certified service provider's
system is functioning properly and the extent to which the seller's
transactions are being processed by the certified service provider.

(2) A person that
provides a certified automated system is responsible for the proper functioning
of that system and is liable to the state for underpayments of tax attributable
to errors in the functioning of the certified automated system. A seller that uses
a certified automated system remains responsible and is liable to the state for
reporting and remitting tax.

(3) A seller that has a
proprietary system for determining the amount of tax due on transactions and
has signed an agreement establishing a performance standard for that system is
liable for the failure of the system to meet the performance standard.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
11. Upon becoming a member of
the streamlined sales and use tax agreement, the department shall prepare
legislation conforming state law as necessary and shall provide such
legislation to the fiscal committees of the legislature.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
12. Sections 1 through 9 of
this act take effect July 1, 2002.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
13. Sections 10 and 11 of
this act become effective when the state becomes a member of the streamlined
sales and use tax agreement.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 14. Sections 1 through 12 of
this act constitute a new chapter in Title 82 RCW.

---
END ---