BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF
WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec.
1. During the regular
session of the 2001 legislature, RCW 84.33.120 was amended by section 3,
chapter 185 and by section 1, chapter 305, and repealed by section 16, chapter
249, each without reference to the other. The purpose of sections 4 through 7 of
this act is to resolve any uncertainty about the status of RCW 84.33.120 caused
by the enactment of three changes involving RCW 84.33.120 during the 2001
regular legislative session.

(1) Chapter 249, Laws
of 2001 both repealed RCW 84.33.120 and incorporated pertinent and vital parts
of RCW 84.33.120 into RCW 84.33.140. The technical amendments made to RCW
84.33.120 by section 3, chapter 185, Laws of 2001 were also made to RCW
84.33.140 by section 5, chapter 185, Laws of 2001. The amendments made to RCW
84.33.120 by section 1, chapter 305, Laws of 2001 were also made to RCW
84.33.140 by section 2, chapter 305, Laws of 2001. Therefore, RCW 84.33.140 as
amended during the 2001 regular legislative session embodies the pertinent and
vital parts of RCW 84.33.120 and the 2001 amendments to RCW 84.33.120.

(2) The legislature
intends to confirm the repeal of RCW 84.33.120, including the 2001 regular
legislative session amendments to that section, as of the effective date of
chapters 185, 249, and 305, Laws of 2001.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
2. During the regular
session of the 2001 legislature, RCW 84.33.130 was amended by section 4,
chapter 185 and by section 2, chapter 249, each without reference to the
other. The purpose of section 4 of this act is to reenact and amend RCW
84.33.130 so that it reflects all amendments made by the legislature.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
3. During the regular
session of the 2001 legislature, RCW 84.34.108 was amended by section 7,
chapter 185, by section 14, chapter 249, and by section 3, chapter 305, each
without reference to the other. The purpose of section 6 of this act is to
reenact and amend RCW 84.34.108 so that it reflects all amendments made by the
legislature and to clarify any misunderstanding as to how the exemption
contained in chapter 305 is to be applied.

Sec. 4. RCW 84.33.130 and 2001 c
249 s 2 and 2001 c 185 s 4 are each reenacted and amended to read as follows:

(1) Notwithstanding any
other provision of law, lands that were assessed as classified forest land
before July 22, 2001, shall be designated forest land for the purposes of this
chapter. The owners of previously classified forest land shall not be required
to apply for designation under this chapter. As of July 22, 2001, the land and
timber on such land shall be assessed and taxed in accordance with the
provisions of this chapter.

(2) An owner of land
desiring that it be designated as forest land and valued under RCW 84.33.140 as
of January 1st of any year shall submit an application to the assessor of the
county in which the land is located before January 1st of that year. The
application shall be accompanied by a reasonable processing fee when the county
legislative authority has established the requirement for such a fee.

(3) No application of
designation is required when publicly owned forest land is exchanged for
privately owned forest land designated under this chapter. The land exchanged
and received by an owner subject to ad valorem taxation shall be automatically
granted designation under this chapter if the following conditions are met:

(a) The land will be
used to grow and harvest timber; and

(b) The owner of the
land submits a document to the assessor's office that explains the details of
the forest land exchange within sixty days of the closing date of the
exchange. However, if the owner fails to submit information regarding the
exchange by the end of this sixty-day period, the owner must file an
application for designation as forest land under this chapter and the regular
application process will be followed.

(4) The application
shall be made upon forms prepared by the department and supplied by the
assessor, and shall include the following:

(a) A legal description
of, or assessor's parcel numbers for, all land the applicant desires to be
designated as forest land;

(b) The date or dates
of acquisition of the land;

(c) A brief description
of the timber on the land, or if the timber has been harvested, the owner's
plan for restocking;

(d) A copy of the
timber management plan, if one exists, for the land prepared by a trained
forester or any other person with adequate knowledge of timber management
practices;

(e) If a timber
management plan exists, an explanation of the nature and extent to which the
management plan has been implemented;

(f) Whether the land is
used for grazing;

(g) Whether the land
has been subdivided or a plat has been filed with respect to the land;

(h) Whether the land
and the applicant are in compliance with the restocking, forest management,
fire protection, insect and disease control, and forest debris provisions of
Title 76 RCW or any applicable rules;

(i) Whether the land is
subject to forest fire protection assessments under RCW 76.04.610;

(j) Whether the land is
subject to a lease, option, or other right that permits it to be used for any
purpose other than growing and harvesting timber;

(k) A summary of the
past experience and activity of the applicant in growing and harvesting timber;

(l) A summary of
current and continuing activity of the applicant in growing and harvesting
timber;

(m) A statement that
the applicant is aware of the potential tax liability involved when the land
ceases to be designated as forest land;

(n) An affirmation that
the statements contained in the application are true and that the land
described in the application meets the definition of forest land in RCW
84.33.035; and

(o) A description
and/or drawing showing what areas of land for which designation is sought are
used for incidental uses compatible with the definition of forest land in RCW
84.33.035.

(5) The assessor shall
afford the applicant an opportunity to be heard if the applicant so requests.

(6) The assessor shall
act upon the application with due regard to all relevant evidence and without
any one or more items of evidence necessarily being determinative, except that
the application may be denied for one of the following reasons, without regard
to other items:

(a) The land does not
contain ((either)) a "merchantable stand of timber" as defined
in chapter 76.09 RCW and applicable rules. This reason shall not alone be
sufficient to deny the application (i) if the land has been recently harvested
or supports a growth of brush or noncommercial type timber, and the application
includes a plan for restocking within three years or a longer period
necessitated by unavailability of seed or seedlings, or (ii) if only isolated
areas within the land do not meet the minimum standards due to rock
outcroppings, swamps, unproductive soil or other natural conditions;

(b) The applicant, with
respect to the land, has failed to comply with a final administrative or
judicial order with respect to a violation of the restocking, forest
management, fire protection, insect and disease control, and forest debris
provisions of Title 76 RCW or any applicable rules under Title 76 RCW;
or

(c) The land abuts a
body of salt water and lies between the line of ordinary high tide and a line
paralleling the ordinary high tide line and two hundred feet horizontally
landward from the high tide line. However, if the assessor determines that a
higher and better use exists for the land but this use would not be permitted
or economically feasible by virtue of any federal, state, or local law or
regulation, the land shall be assessed and valued under RCW 84.33.140 without
being designated as forest land.

(7) The application
shall be deemed to have been approved unless, prior to May 1st of the year
after the application was mailed or delivered to the assessor, the assessor
notifies the applicant in writing of the extent to which the application is
denied.

(8) An owner who
receives notice that his or her application has been denied, in whole or in
part, may appeal the denial to the county board of equalization in accordance
with the provisions of RCW 84.40.038.

Sec. 5. RCW 84.33.140 and 2001 c
305 s 2, 2001 c 249 s 3, and 2001 c 185 s 5 are each reenacted and amended to
read as follows:

(1) When land has been
designated as forest land under RCW 84.33.130, a notation of the designation
shall be made each year upon the assessment and tax rolls. A copy of the
notice of approval together with the legal description or assessor's parcel
numbers for the land shall, at the expense of the applicant, be filed by the
assessor in the same manner as deeds are recorded.

(2) In preparing the
assessment roll as of January 1, 2002, for taxes payable in 2003 and each
January 1st thereafter, the assessor shall list each parcel of designated
forest land at a value with respect to the grade and class provided in this
subsection and adjusted as provided in subsection (3) of this section. The
assessor shall compute the assessed value of the land using the same assessment
ratio applied generally in computing the assessed value of other property in
the county. Values for the several grades of bare forest land shall be as
follows:

LAND OPERABILITY VALUES

GRADE CLASS PER ACRE

1 $234

1 2 229

3 217

4 157

1 198

2 2 190

3 183

4 132

1 154

3 2 149

3 148

4 113

1 117

4 2 114

3 113

4 86

1 85

5 2 78

3 77

4 52

1 43

6 2 39

3 39

4 37

1 21

7 2 21

3 20

4 20

8 1

(3) On or before
December 31, 2001, the department shall adjust by rule under chapter 34.05 RCW,
the forest land values contained in subsection (2) of this section in
accordance with this subsection, and shall certify the adjusted values to the
assessor who will use these values in preparing the assessment roll as of
January 1, 2002. For the adjustment to be made on or before December 31, 2001,
for use in the 2002 assessment year, the department shall:

(a) Divide the
aggregate value of all timber harvested within the state between July 1, 1996,
and June 30, 2001, by the aggregate harvest volume for the same period, as
determined from the harvester excise tax returns filed with the department
under RCW 84.33.074; and

(b) Divide the
aggregate value of all timber harvested within the state between July 1, 1995,
and June 30, 2000, by the aggregate harvest volume for the same period, as
determined from the harvester excise tax returns filed with the department
under RCW 84.33.074; and

(c) Adjust the forest
land values contained in subsection (2) of this section by a percentage equal
to one-half of the percentage change in the average values of harvested timber
reflected by comparing the resultant values calculated under (a) and (b) of
this subsection.

(4) For the adjustments
to be made on or before December 31, 2002, and each succeeding year thereafter,
the same procedure described in subsection (3) of this section shall be
followed using harvester excise tax returns filed under RCW 84.33.074.
However, this adjustment shall be made to the prior year's adjusted value, and
the five-year periods for calculating average harvested timber values shall be
successively one year more recent.

(5) Land graded,
assessed, and valued as forest land shall continue to be so graded, assessed,
and valued until removal of designation by the assessor upon the occurrence of
any of the following:

(a) Receipt of notice
from the owner to remove the designation;

(b) Sale or transfer to
an ownership making the land exempt from ad valorem taxation;

(c) Sale or transfer of
all or a portion of the land to a new owner, unless the new owner has signed a
notice of forest land designation continuance, except transfer to an owner who
is an heir or devisee of a deceased owner, shall not, by itself, result in
removal of designation. The signed notice of continuance shall be attached to
the real estate excise tax affidavit provided for in RCW 82.45.150. The notice
of continuance shall be on a form prepared by the department. If the notice of
continuance is not signed by the new owner and attached to the real estate
excise tax affidavit, all compensating taxes calculated under subsection (11)
of this section shall become due and payable by the seller or transferor at
time of sale. The auditor shall not accept an instrument of conveyance ((of))
regarding designated forest land for filing or recording unless the new
owner has signed the notice of continuance or the compensating tax has been
paid, as evidenced by the real estate excise tax stamp affixed thereto by the
treasurer. The seller, transferor, or new owner may appeal the new assessed
valuation calculated under subsection (11) of this section to the county board
of equalization in accordance with the provisions of RCW 84.40.038. Jurisdiction
is hereby conferred on the county board of equalization to hear these appeals;

(d) Determination by
the assessor, after giving the owner written notice and an opportunity to be
heard, that:

(i) The land is no
longer primarily devoted to and used for growing and harvesting timber.
However, land shall not be removed from designation if a governmental agency,
organization, or other recipient identified in subsection (13) or (14) of this
section as exempt from the payment of compensating tax has manifested its
intent in writing or by other official action to acquire a property interest in
the designated forest land by means of a transaction that qualifies for an
exemption under subsection (13) or (14) of this section. The governmental
agency, organization, or recipient shall annually provide the assessor of the
county in which the land is located reasonable evidence in writing of the
intent to acquire the designated land as long as the intent continues or within
sixty days of a request by the assessor. The assessor may not request this
evidence more than once in a calendar year;

(ii) The owner has
failed to comply with a final administrative or judicial order with respect to
a violation of the restocking, forest management, fire protection, insect and
disease control, and forest debris provisions of Title 76 RCW or any applicable
rules under Title 76 RCW; or

(iii) Restocking has
not occurred to the extent or within the time specified in the application for
designation of such land.

(6) Land shall not be removed
from designation if there is a governmental restriction that prohibits, in
whole or in part, the owner from harvesting ((of)) timber from
the owner's designated forest land. If only a portion of the parcel is
impacted by governmental restrictions of this nature, the restrictions cannot
be used as a basis to remove the remainder of the forest land from designation
under this chapter. For the purposes of this section, "governmental
restrictions" includes: (a) Any law, regulation, rule, ordinance, program,
or other action adopted or taken by a federal, state, county, city, or other
governmental entity; or (b) the land's zoning or its presence within an urban
growth area designated under RCW 36.70A.110.

(7) The assessor shall
have the option of requiring an owner of forest land to file a timber
management plan with the assessor upon the occurrence of one of the following:

(a) An application for
designation as forest land is submitted; or

(b) Designated forest
land is sold or transferred and a notice of continuance, described in
subsection (5)(c) of this section, is signed.

(8) If land is removed
from designation because of any of the circumstances listed in subsection
(5)(a) through (c) of this section, the removal shall apply only to the land
affected. If land is removed from designation because of subsection (5)(d) of
this section, the removal shall apply only to the actual area of land that is
no longer primarily devoted to the growing and harvesting of timber, without
regard to any other land that may have been included in the application and
approved for designation, as long as the remaining designated forest land meets
the definition of forest land contained in RCW 84.33.035.

(9) Within thirty days
after the removal of designation as forest land, the assessor shall notify the
owner in writing, setting forth the reasons for the removal. The seller,
transferor, or owner may appeal the removal to the county board of equalization
in accordance with the provisions of RCW 84.40.038.

(10) Unless the removal
is reversed on appeal a copy of the notice of removal with a notation of the
action, if any, upon appeal, together with the legal description or assessor's
parcel numbers for the land removed from designation shall, at the expense of
the applicant, be filed by the assessor in the same manner as deeds are
recorded and a notation of removal from designation shall immediately be made
upon the assessment and tax rolls. The assessor shall revalue the land to be
removed with reference to its true and fair value as of January 1st of the year
of removal from designation. Both the assessed value before and after the
removal of designation shall be listed. Taxes based on the value of the land
as forest land shall be assessed and payable up until the date of removal and
taxes based on the true and fair value of the land shall be assessed and
payable from the date of removal from designation.

(11) Except as provided
in subsection (5)(c), (13), or (14) of this section, a compensating tax shall
be imposed on land removed from designation as forest land. The compensating
tax shall be due and payable to the treasurer thirty days after the owner is
notified of the amount of this tax. As soon as possible after the land is
removed from designation, the assessor shall compute the amount of compensating
tax and mail a notice to the owner of the amount of compensating tax owed and
the date on which payment of this tax is due. The amount of compensating tax shall
be equal to the difference between the amount of tax last levied on the land as
designated forest land and an amount equal to the new assessed value of the
land multiplied by the dollar rate of the last levy extended against the land,
multiplied by a number, in no event greater than nine, equal to the number of
years for which the land was designated as forest land, plus compensating taxes
on the land at forest land values up until the date of removal and the prorated
taxes on the land at true and fair value from the date of removal to the end of
the current tax year.

(12) Compensating tax,
together with applicable interest thereon, shall become a lien on the land
which shall attach at the time the land is removed from designation as forest
land and shall have priority to and shall be fully paid and satisfied before
any recognizance, mortgage, judgment, debt, obligation, or responsibility to or
with which the land may become charged or liable. The lien may be foreclosed
upon expiration of the same period after delinquency and in the same manner
provided by law for foreclosure of liens for delinquent real property taxes as
provided in RCW 84.64.050. Any compensating tax unpaid on its due date shall
thereupon become delinquent. From the date of delinquency until paid, interest
shall be charged at the same rate applied by law to delinquent ad valorem
property taxes.

(13) The compensating
tax specified in subsection (11) of this section shall not be imposed if the
removal of designation under subsection (5) of this section resulted solely
from:

(a) Transfer to a
government entity in exchange for other forest land located within the state of
Washington;

(b) A taking through
the exercise of the power of eminent domain, or sale or transfer to an entity
having the power of eminent domain in anticipation of the exercise of such
power;

(c) A donation of fee
title, development rights, or the right to harvest timber, to a government
agency or organization qualified under RCW 84.34.210 and 64.04.130 for the
purposes enumerated in those sections, or the sale or transfer of fee title to
a governmental entity or a nonprofit nature conservancy corporation, as defined
in RCW 64.04.130, exclusively for the protection and conservation of lands
recommended for state natural area preserve purposes by the natural heritage
council and natural heritage plan as defined in chapter 79.70 RCW. At such
time as the land is not used for the purposes enumerated, the compensating tax
specified in subsection (11) of this section shall be imposed upon the current
owner;

(d) The sale or
transfer of fee title to the parks and recreation commission for park and
recreation purposes;

(e) Official action by
an agency of the state of Washington or by the county or city within which the
land is located that disallows the present use of the land;

(f) The creation, sale,
or transfer of forestry riparian easements under RCW 76.13.120;

(g) The creation, sale,
or transfer of a fee interest or a conservation easement for the riparian open
space program under RCW 76.09.040;

(h) The sale or
transfer of land within two years after the death of the owner of at least a
fifty percent interest in the land if the land has been assessed and valued as
classified forest land, designated as forest land under this chapter, or
classified under chapter 84.34 RCW continuously since 1993. The date of
death shown on a death certificate is the date used for the purposes of this
subsection (13)(h); or

(i) The sale or
transfer of land after the death of the owner of at least a fifty percent
interest in the land if the land has been assessed and valued as classified
forest land, designated as forest land under this chapter, or classified under
chapter 84.34 RCW continuously since 1993 and the sale or transfer takes place ((within
two years)) after July 22, 2001, and on or before July 22, 2003, and
the death of the owner occurred after January 1, 1991((; or

(j) The date of
death shown on a death certificate is the date used for the purpose of this
subsection (5))). The date
of death shown on a death certificate is the date used for the purposes of this
subsection (13)(i).

(14) In a county with a
population of more than one million inhabitants, the compensating tax specified
in subsection (11) of this section shall not be imposed if the removal of
designation as forest land under subsection (5) of this section resulted solely
from:

(a) An action described
in subsection (13) of this section; or

(b) A transfer of a
property interest to a government entity, or to a nonprofit historic
preservation corporation or nonprofit nature conservancy corporation, as
defined in RCW 64.04.130, to protect or enhance public resources, or to
preserve, maintain, improve, restore, limit the future use of, or otherwise to
conserve for public use or enjoyment, the property interest being transferred.
At such time as the property interest is not used for the purposes enumerated,
the compensating tax shall be imposed upon the current owner.

Sec. 6. RCW 84.34.108 and 2001 c
305 s 3, 2001 c 249 s 14, and 2001 c 185 s 7 are each reenacted and amended to
read as follows:

(1) When land has once
been classified under this chapter, a notation of the classification shall be
made each year upon the assessment and tax rolls and the land shall be valued
pursuant to RCW 84.34.060 or 84.34.065 until removal of all or a portion of the
classification by the assessor upon occurrence of any of the following:

(a) Receipt of notice
from the owner to remove all or a portion of the classification;

(b) Sale or transfer to
an ownership, except a transfer that resulted from a default in loan payments
made to or secured by a governmental agency that intends to or is required by
law or regulation to resell the property for the same use as before, making all
or a portion of the land exempt from ad valorem taxation;

(c) Sale or transfer of
all or a portion of the land to a new owner, unless the new owner has signed a
notice of classification continuance, except transfer to an owner who is an
heir or devisee of a deceased owner shall not, by itself, result in removal of
classification. The notice of continuance shall be on a form prepared by the
department. If the notice of continuance is not signed by the new owner and
attached to the real estate excise tax affidavit, all additional taxes
calculated pursuant to subsection (4) of this section shall become due and
payable by the seller or transferor at time of sale. The auditor shall not
accept an instrument of conveyance ((of)) regarding classified
land for filing or recording unless the new owner has signed the notice of
continuance or the additional tax has been paid, as evidenced by the real
estate excise tax stamp affixed thereto by the treasurer. The seller,
transferor, or new owner may appeal the new assessed valuation calculated under
subsection (4) of this section to the county board of equalization in
accordance with the provisions of RCW 84.40.038. Jurisdiction is hereby
conferred on the county board of equalization to hear these appeals;

(d) Determination by
the assessor, after giving the owner written notice and an opportunity to be
heard, that all or a portion of the land no longer meets the criteria for classification
under this chapter. The criteria for classification pursuant to this chapter
continue to apply after classification has been granted.

The granting authority,
upon request of an assessor, shall provide reasonable assistance to the
assessor in making a determination whether the land continues to meet the
qualifications of RCW 84.34.020 (1) or (3). The assistance shall be provided
within thirty days of receipt of the request.

(2) Land may not be
removed from classification because of:

(a) The creation, sale,
or transfer of forestry riparian easements under RCW 76.13.120; or

(b) The creation, sale,
or transfer of a fee interest or a conservation easement for the riparian open
space program under RCW 76.09.040.

(3) Within thirty days
after such removal of all or a portion of the land from current use
classification, the assessor shall notify the owner in writing, setting forth
the reasons for the removal. The seller, transferor, or owner may appeal the
removal to the county board of equalization in accordance with the provisions
of RCW 84.40.038.

(4) Unless the removal
is reversed on appeal, the assessor shall revalue the affected land with
reference to its true and fair value on January 1st of the year of removal from
classification. Both the assessed valuation before and after the removal of
classification shall be listed and taxes shall be allocated according to that
part of the year to which each assessed valuation applies. Except as provided
in subsection (6) of this section, an additional tax, applicable interest, and
penalty shall be imposed which shall be due and payable to the treasurer thirty
days after the owner is notified of the amount of the additional tax. As soon
as possible, the assessor shall compute the amount of additional tax,
applicable interest, and penalty and the treasurer shall mail notice to the
owner of the amount thereof and the date on which payment is due. The amount
of the additional tax, applicable interest, and penalty shall be determined as
follows:

(a) The amount of
additional tax shall be equal to the difference between the property tax paid
as "open space land", "farm and agricultural land", or
"timber land" and the amount of property tax otherwise due and
payable for the seven years last past had the land not been so classified;

(b) The amount of
applicable interest shall be equal to the interest upon the amounts of the
additional tax paid at the same statutory rate charged on delinquent property
taxes from the dates on which the additional tax could have been paid without
penalty if the land had been assessed at a value without regard to this
chapter;

(c) The amount of the
penalty shall be as provided in RCW 84.34.080. The penalty shall not be
imposed if the removal satisfies the conditions of RCW 84.34.070.

(5) Additional tax,
applicable interest, and penalty, shall become a lien on the land which shall
attach at the time the land is removed from classification under this chapter
and shall have priority to and shall be fully paid and satisfied before any
recognizance, mortgage, judgment, debt, obligation or responsibility to or with
which the land may become charged or liable. This lien may be foreclosed upon
expiration of the same period after delinquency and in the same manner provided
by law for foreclosure of liens for delinquent real property taxes as provided
in RCW 84.64.050 now or as hereafter amended. Any additional tax unpaid on its
due date shall thereupon become delinquent. From the date of delinquency until
paid, interest shall be charged at the same rate applied by law to delinquent
ad valorem property taxes.

(6) The additional tax,
applicable interest, and penalty specified in subsection (4) of this section
shall not be imposed if the removal of classification pursuant to subsection (1)
of this section resulted solely from:

(a) Transfer to a
government entity in exchange for other land located within the state of
Washington;

(b)(i) A taking through
the exercise of the power of eminent domain, or (ii) sale or transfer to an
entity having the power of eminent domain in anticipation of the exercise of
such power, said entity having manifested its intent in writing or by other
official action;

(c) A natural disaster
such as a flood, windstorm, earthquake, or other such calamity rather than by
virtue of the act of the landowner changing the use of the property;

(d) Official action by
an agency of the state of Washington or by the county or city within which the
land is located which disallows the present use of the land;

(e) Transfer of land to
a church when the land would qualify for exemption pursuant to RCW 84.36.020;

(f) Acquisition of
property interests by state agencies or agencies or organizations qualified
under RCW 84.34.210 and 64.04.130 for the purposes enumerated in those sections.
At such time as these property interests are not used for the purposes
enumerated in RCW 84.34.210 and 64.04.130 the additional tax specified in
subsection (4) of this section shall be imposed;

(g) Removal of land
classified as farm and agricultural land under RCW 84.34.020(2)(e);

(h) Removal of land
from classification after enactment of a statutory exemption that qualifies the
land for exemption and receipt of notice from the owner to remove the land from
classification;

(i) The creation, sale,
or transfer of forestry riparian easements under RCW 76.13.120;

(j) The creation, sale,
or transfer of a fee interest or a conservation easement for the riparian open
space program under RCW 76.09.040;

(k) The sale or
transfer of land within two years after the death of the owner of at least a
fifty percent interest in the land if the land has been assessed and valued as
classified forest land, designated as forest land under chapter 84.33 RCW, or
classified under this chapter continuously since 1993. The date of death
shown on a death certificate is the date used for the purposes of this
subsection (6)(k); or

(l) The sale or
transfer of land after the death of the owner of at least a fifty percent
interest in the land if the land has been assessed and valued as classified
forest land, designated as forest land under chapter 84.33 RCW, or classified
under this chapter continuously since 1993 and the sale or transfer takes place
((within two years)) after July 22, 2001, and on or before July 22,
2003, and the death of the owner occurred after January 1, 1991((; or

(m))). The date of death shown on a death
certificate is the date used for the purposes of this subsection (6)(l).

Sec. 7. RCW 36.68.525 and 1994 c
156 s 5 are each amended to read as follows:

A park and recreation
service area may impose regular property tax levies in an amount equal to sixty
cents or less per thousand dollars of assessed value of property in the service
area in each year for six consecutive years when specifically authorized so to
do by a majority of at least three-fifths of the voters thereof approving a
proposition authorizing the levies submitted not more than twelve months prior
to the date on which the proposed initial levy is to be made and not oftener
than twice in such twelve month period, either at a special election or at the
regular election of the service area, at which election the number of voters
voting "yes" on the proposition shall constitute three-fifths of a number
equal to forty percent of the number of voters voting in the service area at
the last preceding general election when the number of voters voting on the
proposition does not exceed forty percent of the number of voters voting in
such taxing district in the last preceding general election; or by a majority
of at least three-fifths of the voters thereof voting on the proposition if the
number of voters voting on the proposition exceeds forty per centum of the
number of voters voting in such taxing district in the last preceding general
election. A proposition authorizing such tax levies shall not be submitted by
a park and recreation service area more than twice in any twelve-month period.
Ballot propositions shall conform with RCW 29.30.111. If a park and recreation
service area is levying property taxes, which in combination with property
taxes levied by other taxing districts result in taxes in excess of the ((nine-dollar
and fifteen)) five dollars and ninety cents per thousand dollars of
assessed valuation limitation provided for in RCW 84.52.043, the park and
recreation service area property tax levy shall be reduced or eliminated before
the property tax levies of other taxing districts are reduced.

Sec. 8. RCW 84.09.030 and 1996 c
230 s 1613 are each amended to read as follows:

Except as follows, the
boundaries of counties, cities and all other taxing districts, for purposes of
property taxation and the levy of property taxes, shall be the established
official boundaries of such districts existing on the first day of March of the
year in which the property tax levy is made.

(1) The official
boundaries of a newly incorporated taxing district shall be established at a
different date in the year in which the incorporation occurred as follows:

(((1))) (a)
Boundaries for a newly incorporated city shall be established on the last day
of March of the year in which the initial property tax levy is made, and the
boundaries of a road district, library district, or fire protection district or
districts, that include any portion of the area that was incorporated within
its boundaries shall be altered as of this date to exclude this area, if the
budget for the newly incorporated city is filed pursuant to RCW 84.52.020 and
the levy request of the newly incorporated city is made pursuant to RCW
84.52.070. Whenever a proposed city incorporation is on the March special
election ballot, the county auditor shall submit the legal description of the
proposed city to the department of revenue on or before the first day of March;

(((2))) (b)
Boundaries for a newly incorporated port district shall be established on the
first day of October if the boundaries of the newly incorporated port district
are coterminous with the boundaries of another taxing district, as they existed
on the first day of March of that year;

(((3))) (c)
Boundaries of any other newly incorporated taxing district shall be established
on the first day of June of the year in which the property tax levy is made if
the taxing district has boundaries coterminous with the boundaries of another
taxing district, as they existed on the first day of March of that year;

(((4))) (d)
Boundaries for a newly incorporated water-sewer district shall be established
on the fifteenth of June of the year in which the proposition under RCW
57.04.050 authorizing a water district excess levy is approved.

(2) The boundaries
of a mosquito control district shall be the established official boundary of
the district existing on the first day of September of the year in which the
property tax levy is made.

(3) The
boundaries of a taxing district shall be established on the first day of June
if territory has been added to, or removed from, the taxing district after the
first day of March of that year with boundaries coterminous with the boundaries
of another taxing district as they existed on the first day of March of that
year. However, the boundaries of a road district, library district, or fire
protection district or districts, that include any portion of the area that was
annexed to a city or town within its boundaries shall be altered as of this
date to exclude this area. In any case where any instrument setting forth the
official boundaries of any newly established taxing district, or setting forth
any change in such boundaries, is required by law to be filed in the office of
the county auditor or other county official, said instrument shall be filed in
triplicate. The officer with whom such instrument is filed shall transmit two
copies to the county assessor.

No
property tax levy shall be made for any taxing district whose boundaries are
not established as of the dates provided in this section.

Sec. 9. RCW 84.09.037 and 1990 c
33 s 597 are each amended to read as follows:

Each school district
affected by a transfer of territory from one school district to another school
district under chapter 28A.315 RCW shall retain its preexisting boundaries for
the purpose of the collection of excess tax levies authorized under RCW 84.52.053
before the effective date of the transfer, for such tax collection years and
for such excess tax levies as the ((state board of education)) regional
committee on school district organization may approve and order that the
transferred territory shall either be subject to or relieved of such excess
levies, as the case may be. For the purpose of all other excess tax levies
previously authorized under chapter 84.52 RCW and all excess tax levies
authorized under RCW 84.52.053 subsequent to the effective date of a transfer
of territory, the boundaries of the affected school districts shall be modified
to recognize the transfer of territory subject to RCW 84.09.030.

Sec. 10. RCW 84.38.130 and 1984 c
220 s 26 are each amended to read as follows:

Special assessments
and/or real property tax obligations deferred under this chapter shall become
payable together with interest as provided in RCW 84.38.100:

(1) Upon the sale of
property which has a deferred special assessment and/or real property tax lien
upon it.

(2) Upon the death of
the claimant with an outstanding deferred special assessment and/or real
property tax lien except a surviving spouse who is qualified under this chapter
may elect to incur the special assessment and/or real property tax lien which
shall then be payable by that spouse as provided in this section.

(3) Upon the
condemnation of property with a deferred special assessment and/or real
property tax lien upon it by a public or private body exercising eminent domain
power, except as otherwise provided in RCW 84.60.070.

(4) At such time as the
claimant ceases to reside permanently in the residence upon which the deferral
has been granted.

(5) Upon the failure of
any condition set forth in RCW 84.38.030 except when the income of the
claimant rises above the level of combined disposable income in RCW
84.38.030(3).

Sec. 11. RCW 84.40.020 and 2001 c
187 s 16 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) All real
property in this state subject to taxation shall be listed and assessed every
year, with reference to its value on the first day of January of the year in
which it is assessed. Such listing and all supporting documents and records
shall be open to public inspection during the regular office hours of the
assessor's office((: PROVIDED, That)). However, confidential
income data is hereby exempted from public inspection as noted in RCW 42.17.260
and 42.17.310.

(2) All personal
property in this state subject to taxation shall be listed and assessed every
year, with reference to its value and ownership on the first day of January of
the year in which it is assessed((: PROVIDED, That if the stock of goods,
wares, merchandise or material, whether in a raw or finished state or in
process of manufacture)). However, if the stock of taxable products or
materials, except for business inventories as defined in RCW 84.36.477,
owned or held by any taxpayer on January 1st of any year does not fairly
represent the average stock of such products or materials carried by ((such))
the taxpayer, ((such)) the stock shall be listed and
assessed upon the basis of the monthly average ((of stock)) owned or
held by ((such)) the taxpayer during the preceding calendar year
or during such portion thereof as the taxpayer was engaged in business.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
12. RCW 84.33.120 (Forest land
valuation--Assessor to list forest land at grade and class values--Computation
of assessed value--Adjustment of values--Certification--Use--Notice of
continuance--Appeals--Removal of classification--Compensating tax) and 2001 c
305 s 1, 2001 c 185 s 3, 1999 sp.s. c 4 s 702, 1999 c 233 s 20, 1997 c 299 s 1,
1995 c 330 s 1, 1992 c 69 s 1, 1986 c 238 s 1, 1984 c 204 s 23, 1981 c 148 s 7,
1980 c 134 s 2, 1974 ex.s. c 187 s 5, 1972 ex.s. c 148 s 5, & 1971 ex.s. c
294 s 12 is repealed.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 13. Sections 4 through 12 of
this act apply to taxes levied for collection in 2003 and thereafter.

---
END ---