BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF
WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec.
1. A new section is added
to chapter 9A.42 RCW to read as follows:

A person is guilty of
the crime of endangerment with a controlled substance if the person knowingly
or intentionally permits a dependent child or dependent adult to be exposed to,
ingest, inhale, or have contact with methamphetamine or ephedrine, pseudoephedrine,
or anhydrous ammonia, that are being used in the manufacture of
methamphetamine. Endangerment with a controlled substance is a class B felony.

Sec. 2. RCW 9.94A.515 and 2001
2nd sp.s. c 12 s 361, 2001 c 300 s 4, 2001 c 217 s 12, and 2001 c 17 s 1 are
each reenacted and amended to read as follows:

TABLE
2

CRIMES
INCLUDED WITHIN EACH SERIOUSNESS LEVEL

XVIAggravated
Murder 1 (RCW 10.95.020)

XVHomicide
by abuse (RCW 9A.32.055)

Malicious
explosion 1 (RCW 70.74.280(1))

Murder
1 (RCW 9A.32.030)

XIVMurder
2 (RCW 9A.32.050)

XIIIMalicious
explosion 2 (RCW 70.74.280(2))

Malicious
placement of an explosive 1 (RCW 70.74.270(1))

XIIAssault
1 (RCW 9A.36.011)

Assault
of a Child 1 (RCW 9A.36.120)

Malicious
placement of an imitation device 1 (RCW 70.74.272(1)(a))

Rape
1 (RCW 9A.44.040)

Rape
of a Child 1 (RCW 9A.44.073)

XIManslaughter
1 (RCW 9A.32.060)

Rape
2 (RCW 9A.44.050)

Rape
of a Child 2 (RCW 9A.44.076)

XChild
Molestation 1 (RCW 9A.44.083)

Indecent
Liberties (with forcible compulsion) (RCW 9A.44.100(1)(a))

Kidnapping
1 (RCW 9A.40.020)

Leading
Organized Crime (RCW 9A.82.060(1)(a))

Malicious
explosion 3 (RCW 70.74.280(3))

Manufacture
of methamphetamine (RCW 69.50.401(a)(1)(ii))

Over
18 and deliver heroin, methamphetamine, a narcotic from Schedule I or II, or
flunitrazepam from Schedule IV to someone under 18 (RCW 69.50.406)

Sexually
Violent Predator Escape (RCW 9A.76.115)

IXAssault
of a Child 2 (RCW 9A.36.130)

Controlled
Substance Homicide (RCW 69.50.415)

Explosive
devices prohibited (RCW 70.74.180)

Hit
and Run‑-Death (RCW 46.52.020(4)(a))

Homicide
by Watercraft, by being under the influence of intoxicating liquor or any drug
(RCW 79A.60.050)

Inciting
Criminal Profiteering (RCW 9A.82.060(1)(b))

Malicious
placement of an explosive 2 (RCW 70.74.270(2))

Over
18 and deliver narcotic from Schedule III, IV, or V or a nonnarcotic, except
flunitrazepam or methamphetamine, from Schedule I-V to someone under 18 and 3
years junior (RCW 69.50.406)

Robbery
1 (RCW 9A.56.200)

Sexual
Exploitation (RCW 9.68A.040)

Vehicular
Homicide, by being under the influence of intoxicating liquor or any drug (RCW
46.61.520)

VIIIArson
1 (RCW 9A.48.020)

Deliver
or possess with intent to deliver methamphetamine (RCW 69.50.401(a)(1)(ii))

Homicide
by Watercraft, by the operation of any vessel in a reckless manner (RCW
79A.60.050)

Manslaughter
2 (RCW 9A.32.070)

Manufacture,
deliver, or possess with intent to deliver amphetamine (RCW
69.50.401(a)(1)(ii))

Manufacture,
deliver, or possess with intent to deliver heroin or cocaine (RCW
69.50.401(a)(1)(i))

Possession
of Ephedrine, Pseudoephedrine, or Anhydrous Ammonia with intent to manufacture
methamphetamine (RCW 69.50.440)

Promoting
Prostitution 1 (RCW 9A.88.070)

Selling
for profit (controlled or counterfeit) any controlled substance (RCW 69.50.410)

Theft
of Anhydrous Ammonia (RCW 69.55.010)

Vehicular
Homicide, by the operation of any vehicle in a reckless manner (RCW 46.61.520)

VIIBurglary
1 (RCW 9A.52.020)

Child
Molestation 2 (RCW 9A.44.086)

Dealing
in depictions of minor engaged in sexually explicit conduct (RCW 9.68A.050)

Drive-by
Shooting (RCW 9A.36.045)

Homicide
by Watercraft, by disregard for the safety of others (RCW 79A.60.050)

Indecent
Liberties (without forcible compulsion) (RCW 9A.44.100(1) (b) and (c))

Introducing
Contraband 1 (RCW 9A.76.140)

Involving
a minor in drug dealing (RCW 69.50.401(f))

Malicious
placement of an explosive 3 (RCW 70.74.270(3))

Sending,
bringing into state depictions of minor engaged in sexually explicit conduct
(RCW 9.68A.060)

Unlawful
Possession of a Firearm in the first degree (RCW 9.41.040(1)(a))

Use
of a Machine Gun in Commission of a Felony (RCW 9.41.225)

Vehicular
Homicide, by disregard for the safety of others (RCW 46.61.520)

VIBail
Jumping with Murder 1 (RCW 9A.76.170(3)(a))

Bribery
(RCW 9A.68.010)

Incest
1 (RCW 9A.64.020(1))

Intimidating
a Judge (RCW 9A.72.160)

Intimidating
a Juror/Witness (RCW 9A.72.110, 9A.72.130)

Malicious
placement of an imitation device 2 (RCW 70.74.272(1)(b))

Manufacture,
deliver, or possess with intent to deliver narcotics from Schedule I or II
(except heroin or cocaine) or flunitrazepam from Schedule IV (RCW
69.50.401(a)(1)(i))

Rape
of a Child 3 (RCW 9A.44.079)

Theft
of a Firearm (RCW 9A.56.300)

Unlawful
Storage of Anhydrous Ammonia (RCW 69.55.020)

VAbandonment
of dependent person 1 (RCW 9A.42.060)

Advancing
money or property for extortionate extension of credit (RCW 9A.82.030)

Bail
Jumping with class A Felony (RCW 9A.76.170(3)(b))

Child
Molestation 3 (RCW 9A.44.089)

Criminal
Mistreatment 1 (RCW 9A.42.020)

Custodial
Sexual Misconduct 1 (RCW 9A.44.160)

Delivery
of imitation controlled substance by person eighteen or over to person under
eighteen (RCW 69.52.030(2))

Domestic
Violence Court Order Violation (RCW 10.99.040, 10.99.050, 26.09.300, 26.10.220,
26.26.138, 26.50.110, 26.52.070, or 74.34.145)

Endangerment
with a Controlled Substance (section 1 of this act)

Extortion
1 (RCW 9A.56.120)

Extortionate
Extension of Credit (RCW 9A.82.020)

Extortionate
Means to Collect Extensions of Credit (RCW 9A.82.040)

Incest
2 (RCW 9A.64.020(2))

Kidnapping
2 (RCW 9A.40.030)

Perjury
1 (RCW 9A.72.020)

Persistent
prison misbehavior (RCW 9.94.070)

Possession
of a Stolen Firearm (RCW 9A.56.310)

Rape
3 (RCW 9A.44.060)

Rendering
Criminal Assistance 1 (RCW 9A.76.070)

Sexual
Misconduct with a Minor 1 (RCW 9A.44.093)

Sexually
Violating Human Remains (RCW 9A.44.105)

Stalking
(RCW 9A.46.110)

IVArson
2 (RCW 9A.48.030)

Assault
2 (RCW 9A.36.021)

Assault
by Watercraft (RCW 79A.60.060)

Bribing
a Witness/Bribe Received by Witness (RCW 9A.72.090, 9A.72.100)

Commercial
Bribery (RCW 9A.68.060)

Counterfeiting
(RCW 9.16.035(4))

Escape
1 (RCW 9A.76.110)

Hit
and Run‑-Injury (RCW 46.52.020(4)(b))

Hit
and Run with Vessel‑-Injury Accident (RCW 79A.60.200(3))

Identity
Theft 1 (RCW 9.35.020(2)(a))

Indecent
Exposure to Person Under Age Fourteen (subsequent sex offense) (RCW 9A.88.010)

Influencing
Outcome of Sporting Event (RCW 9A.82.070)

Knowingly
Trafficking in Stolen Property (RCW 9A.82.050(2))

Malicious
Harassment (RCW 9A.36.080)

Manufacture,
deliver, or possess with intent to deliver narcotics from Schedule III, IV, or
V or nonnarcotics from Schedule I-V (except marijuana, amphetamine,
methamphetamines, or flunitrazepam) (RCW 69.50.401(a)(1) (iii) through (v))

Residential
Burglary (RCW 9A.52.025)

Robbery
2 (RCW 9A.56.210)

Theft
of Livestock 1 (RCW 9A.56.080)

Threats
to Bomb (RCW 9.61.160)

Use
of Proceeds of Criminal Profiteering (RCW 9A.82.080 (1) and (2))

Vehicular
Assault, by being under the influence of intoxicating liquor or any drug, or by
the operation or driving of a vehicle in a reckless manner (RCW 46.61.522)

Willful
Failure to Return from Furlough (RCW 72.66.060)

IIIAbandonment
of dependent person 2 (RCW 9A.42.070)

Assault
3 (RCW 9A.36.031)

Assault
of a Child 3 (RCW 9A.36.140)

Bail
Jumping with class B or C Felony (RCW 9A.76.170(3)(c))

Burglary
2 (RCW 9A.52.030)

Communication
with a Minor for Immoral Purposes (RCW 9.68A.090)

Criminal
Gang Intimidation (RCW 9A.46.120)

Criminal
Mistreatment 2 (RCW 9A.42.030)

Custodial
Assault (RCW 9A.36.100)

Delivery
of a material in lieu of a controlled substance (RCW 69.50.401(c))

Escape
2 (RCW 9A.76.120)

Extortion
2 (RCW 9A.56.130)

Harassment
(RCW 9A.46.020)

Intimidating
a Public Servant (RCW 9A.76.180)

Introducing
Contraband 2 (RCW 9A.76.150)

Maintaining
a Dwelling or Place for Controlled Substances (RCW 69.50.402(a)(6))

Malicious
Injury to Railroad Property (RCW 81.60.070)

Manufacture,
deliver, or possess with intent to deliver marijuana (RCW 69.50.401(a)(1)(iii))

Manufacture,
distribute, or possess with intent to distribute an imitation controlled
substance (RCW 69.52.030(1))

Patronizing
a Juvenile Prostitute (RCW 9.68A.100)

Perjury
2 (RCW 9A.72.030)

Possession
of Incendiary Device (RCW 9.40.120)

Possession
of Machine Gun or Short-Barreled Shotgun or Rifle (RCW 9.41.190)

Promoting
Prostitution 2 (RCW 9A.88.080)

Recklessly
Trafficking in Stolen Property (RCW 9A.82.050(1))

Securities
Act violation (RCW 21.20.400)

Tampering
with a Witness (RCW 9A.72.120)

Telephone
Harassment (subsequent conviction or threat of death) (RCW 9.61.230)

Theft
of Livestock 2 (RCW 9A.56.080)

Unlawful
Imprisonment (RCW 9A.40.040)

Unlawful
possession of firearm in the second degree (RCW 9.41.040(1)(b))

Unlawful
Use of Building for Drug Purposes (RCW 69.53.010)

Vehicular
Assault, by the operation or driving of a vehicle with disregard for the safety
of others (RCW 46.61.522)

Willful
Failure to Return from Work Release (RCW 72.65.070)

IIComputer
Trespass 1 (RCW 9A.52.110)

Counterfeiting
(RCW 9.16.035(3))

Create,
deliver, or possess a counterfeit controlled substance (RCW 69.50.401(b))

Escape
from Community Custody (RCW 72.09.310)

Health
Care False Claims (RCW 48.80.030)

Identity
Theft 2 (RCW 9.35.020(2)(b))

Improperly
Obtaining Financial Information (RCW 9.35.010)

Malicious
Mischief 1 (RCW 9A.48.070)

Possession
of controlled substance that is either heroin or narcotics from Schedule I or
II or flunitrazepam from Schedule IV (RCW 69.50.401(d))

Possession
of phencyclidine (PCP) (RCW 69.50.401(d))

Possession
of Stolen Property 1 (RCW 9A.56.150)

Theft
1 (RCW 9A.56.030)

Theft
of Rental, Leased, or Lease-purchased Property (valued at one thousand five
hundred dollars or more) (RCW 9A.56.096(4))

Trafficking
in Insurance Claims (RCW 48.30A.015)

Unlawful
Practice of Law (RCW 2.48.180)

Unlicensed
Practice of a Profession or Business (RCW 18.130.190(7))

IAttempting
to Elude a Pursuing Police Vehicle (RCW 46.61.024)

False
Verification for Welfare (RCW 74.08.055)

Forged
Prescription (RCW 69.41.020)

Forged
Prescription for a Controlled Substance (RCW 69.50.403)

Forgery
(RCW 9A.60.020)

Malicious
Mischief 2 (RCW 9A.48.080)

Possess
Controlled Substance that is a Narcotic from Schedule III, IV, or V or
Non-narcotic from Schedule I-V (except phencyclidine or flunitrazepam) (RCW
69.50.401(d))

Possession
of Stolen Property 2 (RCW 9A.56.160)

Reckless
Burning 1 (RCW 9A.48.040)

Taking
Motor Vehicle Without Permission (RCW 9A.56.070)

Theft
2 (RCW 9A.56.040)

Theft
of Rental, Leased, or Lease-purchased Property (valued at two hundred fifty
dollars or more but less than one thousand five hundred dollars) (RCW
9A.56.096(4))

Unlawful
Issuance of Checks or Drafts (RCW 9A.56.060)

Unlawful
Use of Food Stamps (RCW 9.91.140 (2) and (3))

Vehicle
Prowl 1 (RCW 9A.52.095)

Sec. 3. RCW 13.34.132 and 2000 c
122 s 16 are each amended to read as follows:

A court may order that
a petition seeking termination of the parent and child relationship be filed if
the following requirements are met:

(1) The court has
removed the child from his or her home pursuant to RCW 13.34.130;

(2) Termination is
recommended by the supervising agency;

(3) Termination is in
the best interests of the child; and

(4) Because of the
existence of aggravated circumstances, reasonable efforts to unify the family
are not required. Notwithstanding the existence of aggravated circumstances,
reasonable efforts may be required if the court or department determines it is
in the best interests of the child. In determining whether aggravated
circumstances exist by clear, cogent, and convincing evidence, the court shall
consider one or more of the following:

(a) Conviction of the
parent of rape of the child in the first, second, or third degree as defined in
RCW 9A.44.073, 9A.44.076, and 9A.44.079;

(b) Conviction of the
parent of criminal mistreatment of the child in the first or second degree as
defined in RCW 9A.42.020 and 9A.42.030;

(c) Conviction of
the parent of endangerment with a controlled substance as defined in section 1
of this act, when the child is the victim;

(d) Conviction
of the parent of one of the following assault crimes, when the child is the
victim: Assault in the first or second degree as defined in RCW 9A.36.011 and
9A.36.021 or assault of a child in the first or second degree as defined in RCW
9A.36.120 or 9A.36.130;

(((d))) (e)
Conviction of the parent of murder, manslaughter, or homicide by abuse of the
child's other parent, sibling, or another child;

(((e))) (f)
Conviction of the parent of attempting, soliciting, or conspiring to commit a
crime listed in (a), (b), (c), ((or)) (d), or (e) of this
subsection;

(((f))) (g)
A finding by a court that a parent is a sexually violent predator as defined in
RCW 71.09.020;

(((g))) (h)
Failure of the parent to complete available treatment ordered under this
chapter or the equivalent laws of another state, where such failure has
resulted in a prior termination of parental rights to another child and the
parent has failed to effect significant change in the interim. In the case of
a parent of an Indian child, as defined in the Indian Child Welfare Act, P.L.
95-608 (25 U.S.C. Sec. 1903), the court shall also consider tribal efforts to
assist the parent in completing treatment and make it possible for the child to
return home;

(((h))) (i)
An infant under three years of age has been abandoned;

(((i))) (j)
Conviction of the parent, when a child has been born of the offense, of: (A) A
sex offense under chapter 9A.44 RCW; or (B) incest under RCW 9A.64.020.

Sec. 4. RCW 43.43.830 and 1999 c
45 s 5 are each amended to read as follows:

Unless the context
clearly requires otherwise, the definitions in this section apply throughout
RCW 43.43.830 through 43.43.840.

(1)
"Applicant" means:

(a) Any prospective
employee who will or may have unsupervised access to children under sixteen
years of age or developmentally disabled persons or vulnerable adults during
the course of his or her employment or involvement with the business or
organization;

(b) Any prospective
volunteer who will have regularly scheduled unsupervised access to children
under sixteen years of age, developmentally disabled persons, or vulnerable
adults during the course of his or her employment or involvement with the
business or organization under circumstances where such access will or may
involve groups of (i) five or fewer children under twelve years of age, (ii)
three or fewer children between twelve and sixteen years of age, (iii)
developmentally disabled persons, or (iv) vulnerable adults; or

(c) Any prospective
adoptive parent, as defined in RCW 26.33.020.

(2) "Business or
organization" means a business or organization licensed in this state, any
agency of the state, or other governmental entity, that educates, trains,
treats, supervises, houses, or provides recreation to developmentally disabled
persons, vulnerable adults, or children under sixteen years of age, including
but not limited to public housing authorities, school districts, and
educational service districts.

(3) "Civil
adjudication" means a specific court finding of sexual abuse or
exploitation or physical abuse in a dependency action under RCW 13.34.040 or in
a domestic relations action under Title 26 RCW. In the case of vulnerable
adults, civil adjudication means a specific court finding of abuse or financial
exploitation in a protection proceeding under chapter 74.34 RCW. It does not
include administrative proceedings. The term "civil adjudication" is
further limited to court findings that identify as the perpetrator of the abuse
a named individual, over the age of eighteen years, who was a party to the
dependency or dissolution proceeding or was a respondent in a protection
proceeding in which the finding was made and who contested the allegation of
abuse or exploitation.

(4) "Conviction
record" means "conviction record" information as defined in RCW
10.97.030(3) relating to a crime against children or other persons committed by
either an adult or a juvenile. It does not include a conviction for an offense
that has been the subject of an expungement, pardon, annulment, certificate of
rehabilitation, or other equivalent procedure based on a finding of the
rehabilitation of the person convicted, or a conviction that has been the
subject of a pardon, annulment, or other equivalent procedure based on a
finding of innocence. It does include convictions for offenses for which the
defendant received a deferred or suspended sentence, unless the record has been
expunged according to law.

(5) "Crime against
children or other persons" means a conviction of any of the following
offenses: Aggravated murder; first or second degree murder; first or second
degree kidnaping; first, second, or third degree assault; first, second, or
third degree assault of a child; first, second, or third degree rape; first,
second, or third degree rape of a child; first or second degree robbery; first
degree arson; first degree burglary; first or second degree manslaughter; first
or second degree extortion; indecent liberties; incest; vehicular homicide;
first degree promoting prostitution; communication with a minor; unlawful
imprisonment; simple assault; sexual exploitation of minors; first or second
degree criminal mistreatment; endangerment with a controlled substance;
child abuse or neglect as defined in RCW 26.44.020; first or second degree
custodial interference; first or second degree custodial sexual misconduct;
malicious harassment; first, second, or third degree child molestation; first
or second degree sexual misconduct with a minor; patronizing a juvenile
prostitute; child abandonment; promoting pornography; selling or distributing
erotic material to a minor; custodial assault; violation of child abuse
restraining order; child buying or selling; prostitution; felony indecent
exposure; criminal abandonment; or any of these crimes as they may be renamed
in the future.

(6) "Crimes
relating to drugs" means a conviction of a crime to manufacture, delivery,
or possession with intent to manufacture or deliver a controlled substance.

(7) "Crimes
relating to financial exploitation" means a conviction for first, second,
or third degree extortion; first, second, or third degree theft; first or
second degree robbery; forgery; or any of these crimes as they may be renamed
in the future.

(8) "Disciplinary
board final decision" means any final decision issued by a disciplining
authority under chapter 18.130 RCW or the secretary of the department of health
for the following businesses or professions:

(a) Chiropractic;

(b) Dentistry;

(c) Dental hygiene;

(d) Massage;

(e) Midwifery;

(f) Naturopathy;

(g) Osteopathic
medicine and surgery;

(h) Physical therapy;

(i) Physicians;

(j) Practical nursing;

(k) Registered nursing;
and

(l) Psychology.

"Disciplinary
board final decision," for real estate brokers and salespersons, means any
final decision issued by the director of the department of licensing for real
estate brokers and salespersons.

(9)
"Unsupervised" means not in the presence of:

(a) Another employee or
volunteer from the same business or organization as the applicant; or

(b) Any relative or
guardian of any of the children or developmentally disabled persons or
vulnerable adults to which the applicant has access during the course of his or
her employment or involvement with the business or organization.

(10) "Vulnerable
adult" means "vulnerable adult" as defined in chapter 74.34 RCW,
except that for the purposes of requesting and receiving background checks
pursuant to RCW 43.43.832, it shall also include adults of any age who lack the
functional, mental, or physical ability to care for themselves.

(11) "Financial
exploitation" means the illegal or improper use of a vulnerable adult or
that adult's resources for another person's profit or advantage.

(12) "Agency"
means any person, firm, partnership, association, corporation, or facility
which receives, provides services to, houses or otherwise cares for vulnerable
adults.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 5. This act is necessary for
the immediate preservation of the public peace, health, or safety, or support
of the state government and its existing public institutions, and takes effect
immediately.

---
END ---