BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF
WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec.
1. RCW 74.09.757 (Acquired human
immunodeficiency syndrome insurance program (HIV/AIDS)) and 1993 c 264 s 1
& 1989 c 260 s 3 are each repealed.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
2. A new section is added
to chapter 43.70 RCW to read as follows:

(1) "Human
immunodeficiency virus insurance program," as used in this section, means
the program that provides health insurance coverage for individuals with human
immunodeficiency virus, as defined in RCW 70.24.017(7), who meet eligibility
requirements established by the department of health.

(2) The department of
health may pay for health insurance coverage on behalf of persons with human immunodeficiency
virus, who meet department eligibility requirements, and who are eligible for
"continuation coverage" as provided by the federal consolidated
omnibus budget reconciliation act of 1985, group health insurance policies, or
individual policies.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 3. This act takes effect
July 1, 2002.

---
END ---