BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF
WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec.
1. A new section is added
to chapter 19.158 RCW to read as follows:

(1) A telephone
solicitor may not, in making a telephone solicitation call, block the identity
of the telephone number from which the telephone call is made to evade devices
designed to identify telephone callers.

(2) A telephone
solicitor may not:

(a) Interfere with or
circumvent the capability of a caller identification service to access or
provide to the recipient of the telephone solicitation call any information
regarding the call that the service is capable of providing; and

(b) Fail to provide
caller identification information in a manner that is accessible by a caller
identification service, if the person has capability to provide the information
in that manner.

(3) For purposes of
this section, the use of telecommunication service or equipment that is
incapable of transmitting caller identification information does not of itself
constitute interference with or circumvention of the capability of a caller
identification service to access or provide the information.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
2. A new section is added
to chapter 19.158 RCW to read as follows:

The
department of licensing must investigate complaints concerning violations of
section 1 of this act by a licensee and may assess an administrative penalty
not to exceed one thousand dollars for each violation. In addition, if the
department of licensing finds that the licensee willfully or knowingly violated
section 1 of this act, the department of licensing may suspend or revoke the
licensee's license.

---
END ---