BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF
WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec.
1. (1) The legislature finds
that:

(a) Thirty-four percent
of children with disabilities may be perceived as less valuable than other
children;

(b) Children with
disabilities are maltreated 1.7 times the rate of other children;

(c) One in ten
Americans has a severe disability;

(d) Nine million people
of all ages have disabilities so severe that they require personal assistance
to carry out day-to-day activities; and

(e) In the general
population, child victims of abuse are at high risk for multiple problems,
including depression, anxiety, and low self-esteem. Consequences of abuse may
be more pronounced in children with disabilities because of their already
vulnerable physical and psychological state. Research has shown that the
longer abuse has gone on the more damage may result. Since the child with
disabilities who is abused is less likely to be identified, he or she is likely
to suffer more damage because of long-term abuse. Abuse may exacerbate
existing disabilities and cause additional permanent disabilities.

(2) The purposes of
this act are to:

(a) Inform and educate
elementary students about disabilities and diseases that cause deformities; and

(b) Provide students
with the proper etiquette and skills to interact with those who are disabled.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
2. The definitions in this
section apply throughout this chapter unless the context clearly requires
otherwise.

(1)
"Albinism" means the absence of normal pigmentation in a person
wherein, no melanin is produced resulting in milk-white and pink skin, white
hair, and weak eyes.

(2)
"Amputations" means the removal of parts of the body, usually limbs.

(3) "Autism"
means a developmental disability significantly affecting verbal and nonverbal
communication and social interaction which adversely affect performance.
Characteristics associated with autism involve engagement in repetitive activities,
resistance to environmental change or change in routine, and unusual responses
to sensory experience.

(4)
"Blindness" means an impairment in vision that does not allow for
sight.

(5) "Burns"
means damage to the body due to heat, resulting in deformation of the areas
affected.

(6) "Cerebral
palsy" means impaired muscular power and coordination from brain damage
usually occurring at or before birth.

(7) "Common
courtesies" means often used polite behavior.

(8)
"Conversational skills" means abilities used when speaking.

(9)
"Deafness" means partially or completely incapable of hearing.

(10)
"Disabilities" means physical or mental impairments that
substantially limit one or more major life activities.

(11)
"Etiquette" means a governing code of behavior or courtesy.

(12) "Hearing
impairments" means an impairment in hearing, whether permanent or
fluctuating, that adversely affects performance.

(13) "Mental
retardation" means significantly under average general intellectual
functioning, existing concurrently with deficits in adaptive behavior and
manifested during the developmental period that adversely affects performance.

(14) "Multiple
sclerosis" means a degenerative disease of the central nervous system, in
which hardening of the tissues occurs throughout the brain or spinal cord, or
both and that results in a lack of muscular control.

(15) "Orthopedic
impairment" means an impairment that affects skeletal system and/or
associated motor organs and includes impairments caused by congenital anomaly such
as clubfoot, lobster claw syndrome, and absence of some extremity, impairments
caused by disease such as bone tuberculosis, and impairments from other causes
such as fractures or burns that cause contractures.

(16) "Skin
conditions" means impairments that effect the skin in a way that affects
performance.

(17) "Speech or
language impairment" means a communication disorder, such as stuttering,
impaired articulation, a language impairment, or a voice impairment, that
adversely affects performance.

(18) "Visual
impairments" means an impairment in vision that, even with correction,
adversely affects performance and includes both partial sight and blindness.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
3. (1) Except as provided in
subsection (2) of this section, all elementary schools shall adopt a
disabilities awareness program.

(a) The program must
include information covering mental retardation, hearing impairments including
deafness, speech or language impairment, visual impairments including blindness,
autism, and orthopedic impairments including cerebral palsy, amputations, and
multiple sclerosis, skin conditions including albinism, and burns.

(b) The program must
include an etiquette section that includes information about how to address
those who are disabled, common courtesies, and conversational skills.

(c) Students must
attend the program at least once by the time they reach the third grade.

(2) Students who have a
disability are not required to take the program.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
4. This chapter may be known
and cited as the disabilities awareness act.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
5. Sections 1 through 4 of
this act constitute a new chapter in Title 28A RCW.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 6. This act takes effect
August 1, 2003.

---
END ---