BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF
WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1. RCW 66.44.010 and 1998 c
18 s 1 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) All county and
municipal peace officers are hereby charged with the duty of investigating and
prosecuting all violations of this title, and the penal laws of this state
relating to the manufacture, importation, transportation, possession,
distribution and sale of liquor, and all fines imposed for violations of this
title and the penal laws of this state relating to the manufacture,
importation, transportation, possession, distribution and sale of liquor shall
belong to the county, city or town wherein the court imposing the fine is
located, and shall be placed in the general fund for payment of the salaries of
those engaged in the enforcement of the provisions of this title and the penal
laws of this state relating to the manufacture, importation, transportation,
possession, distribution and sale of liquor: PROVIDED, That all fees, fines,
forfeitures and penalties collected or assessed by a district court because of
the violation of a state law shall be remitted as provided in chapter 3.62 RCW
as now exists or is later amended.

(2) In addition to any
and all other powers granted, the board shall have the power to enforce the
penal provisions of this title and the penal laws of this state relating to the
manufacture, importation, transportation, possession, distribution and sale of
liquor.

(3) In addition to the
other duties under this section, the board shall enforce chapters 82.24 and
82.26 RCW.

(4) The
board may appoint and employ, assign to duty and fix the compensation of,
officers to be designated as liquor enforcement officers. Such liquor
enforcement officers shall have the power, under the supervision of the board,
to enforce the penal provisions of this title and the penal laws of this state
relating to the manufacture, importation, transportation, possession,
distribution and sale of liquor. They shall have the power and authority to
serve and execute all warrants and process of law issued by the courts in
enforcing the penal provisions of this title or of any penal law of this state
relating to the manufacture, importation, transportation, possession,
distribution and sale of liquor, and the provisions of chapters 82.24 and 82.26
RCW. They shall have the power to arrest without a warrant any person or
persons found in the act of violating any of the penal provisions of this title
or of any penal law of this state relating to the manufacture, importation,
transportation, possession, distribution and sale of liquor, and the provisions
of chapters 82.24 and 82.26 RCW. When acting within the scope of these
duties and when an offense occurs in the presence of the liquor enforcement
officer, the liquor enforcement officer may enforce all criminal laws of the
state. The liquor enforcement officer must have successfully completed the
basic law enforcement academy course sponsored by the criminal justice training
commission, or a course approved by the board and the criminal justice training
commission and provided by the board or the criminal justice training
commission, before enforcing the criminal laws of the state.

--- END ---