BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF
WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1. RCW 42.17.090 and 1993 c
256 s 6 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) Each report
required under RCW 42.17.080 (1) and (2) shall disclose the following:

(a) The funds on hand
at the beginning of the period;

(b) The name and
address of each person who has made one or more contributions during the
period, ((together with)) the money value and date of such contributions
and the aggregate value of all contributions received from each such person
during the campaign or in the case of a continuing political committee, the
current calendar year, and in the case of a person who has made one or more
contributions in the aggregate amount of one hundred dollars or more, the
person's occupation and the name and address of the person's employer:
PROVIDED, That pledges in the aggregate of less than one hundred dollars from
any one person need not be reported: PROVIDED FURTHER, That the income which
results from a fund-raising activity conducted in accordance with RCW 42.17.067
may be reported as one lump sum, with the exception of that portion of such
income which was received from persons whose names and addresses are required
to be included in the report required by RCW 42.17.067: PROVIDED FURTHER, That
contributions of no more than twenty-five dollars in the aggregate from any one
person during the election campaign may be reported as one lump sum so long as
the campaign treasurer maintains a separate and private list of the name,
address, and amount of each such contributor: PROVIDED FURTHER, That the money
value of contributions of postage shall be the face value of such postage;

(c) Each loan,
promissory note, or security instrument to be used by or for the benefit of the
candidate or political committee made by any person, together with the names
and addresses of the lender and each person liable directly, indirectly or
contingently and the date and amount of each such loan, promissory note, or
security instrument;

(d) All other
contributions not otherwise listed or exempted;

(e) The name and
address of each candidate or political committee to which any transfer of funds
was made, together with the amounts and dates of such transfers;

(f) The name and
address of each person to whom an expenditure was made in the aggregate amount
of more than fifty dollars during the period covered by this report, and the
amount, date, and purpose of each such expenditure. A candidate for state
executive or state legislative office or the political committee of such a
candidate shall report this information for an expenditure under one of the
following categories, whichever is appropriate: (i) Expenditures for the
election of the candidate; (ii) expenditures for nonreimbursed public
office-related expenses; (iii) expenditures required to be reported under (e)
of this subsection; or (iv) expenditures of surplus funds and other
expenditures. The report of such a candidate or committee shall contain a
separate total of expenditures for each category and a total sum of all
expenditures. Other candidates and political committees need not report
information regarding expenditures under the categories listed in (i) through
(iv) of this subsection or under similar such categories unless required to do
so by the commission by rule. The report of such an other candidate or
committee shall also contain the total sum of all expenditures;

(g) The name and
address of each person to whom any expenditure was made directly or indirectly
to compensate the person for soliciting or procuring signatures on an
initiative or referendum petition, the amount of such compensation to each such
person, and the total of the expenditures made for this purpose. Such
expenditures shall be reported under this subsection (1)(g) whether the
expenditures are or are not also required to be reported under (f) of this
subsection;

(h) The name and
address of any person and the amount owed for any debt, obligation, note,
unpaid loan, or other liability in the amount of more than two hundred fifty
dollars or in the amount of more than fifty dollars that has been outstanding
for over thirty days;

(i) The surplus or
deficit of contributions over expenditures;

(j) The disposition
made in accordance with RCW 42.17.095 of any surplus funds;

(k) Such other
information as shall be required by the commission by rule in conformance with
the policies and purposes of this chapter; and

(l) Funds received from
a political committee not otherwise required to report under this chapter (a
"nonreporting committee"). Such funds shall be forfeited to the
state of Washington unless the nonreporting committee has filed or within ten
days following such receipt files with the commission a statement disclosing:
(i) Its name and address; (ii) the purposes of the nonreporting committee;
(iii) the names, addresses, and titles of its officers or if it has no
officers, the names, addresses, and titles of its responsible leaders; (iv) the
name, office sought, and party affiliation of each candidate in the state of
Washington whom the nonreporting committee is supporting, and, if such
committee is supporting the entire ticket of any party, the name of the party;
(v) the ballot proposition supported or opposed in the state of Washington, if
any, and whether such committee is in favor of or opposed to such proposition;
(vi) the name and address of each person residing in the state of Washington or
corporation which has a place of business in the state of Washington who has
made one or more contributions in the aggregate of more than twenty-five
dollars to the nonreporting committee during the current calendar year,
together with the money value and date of such contributions; (vii) the name
and address of each person in the state of Washington to whom an expenditure
was made by the nonreporting committee on behalf of a candidate or political
committee in the aggregate amount of more than fifty dollars, the amount, date,
and purpose of such expenditure, and the total sum of such expenditures; (viii)
such other information as the commission may prescribe by rule, in keeping with
the policies and purposes of this chapter. A nonreporting committee incurring
an obligation to file additional reports in a calendar year may satisfy the
obligation by filing with the commission a letter providing updating or
amending information.

(2) The treasurer and
the candidate shall certify the correctness of each report.

Sec. 2. RCW 42.17.370 and 1995 c
397 s 17 are each amended to read as follows:

The commission is
empowered to:

(1) Adopt, promulgate,
amend, and rescind suitable administrative rules to carry out the policies and
purposes of this chapter, which rules shall be adopted under chapter 34.05
RCW. Any rule relating to campaign finance, political advertising, or related
forms that would otherwise take effect after June 30th of a general election
year shall take effect no earlier than the day following the general election
in that year;

(2) Appoint and set,
within the limits established by the committee on agency officials' salaries
under RCW 43.03.028, the compensation of an executive director who shall
perform such duties and have such powers as the commission may prescribe and
delegate to implement and enforce this chapter efficiently and effectively.
The commission shall not delegate its authority to adopt, amend, or rescind
rules nor shall it delegate authority to determine whether an actual violation
of this chapter has occurred or to assess penalties for such violations;

(3) Prepare and publish
such reports and technical studies as in its judgment will tend to promote the
purposes of this chapter, including reports and statistics concerning campaign
financing, lobbying, financial interests of elected officials, and enforcement
of this chapter;

(4) Make from time to
time, on its own motion, audits and field investigations;

(5) Make public the
time and date of any formal hearing set to determine whether a violation has
occurred, the question or questions to be considered, and the results thereof;

(6) Administer oaths
and affirmations, issue subpoenas, and compel attendance, take evidence and
require the production of any books, papers, correspondence, memorandums, or
other records relevant or material for the purpose of any investigation
authorized under this chapter, or any other proceeding under this chapter;

(7) Adopt and
promulgate a code of fair campaign practices;

(8) Relieve, by rule,
candidates or political committees of obligations to comply with the provisions
of this chapter relating to election campaigns, if they have not received
contributions nor made expenditures in connection with any election campaign of
more than one thousand dollars;

(9) Adopt rules
prescribing reasonable requirements for keeping accounts of and reporting on a
quarterly basis costs incurred by state agencies, counties, cities, and other
municipalities and political subdivisions in preparing, publishing, and
distributing legislative information. The term "legislative
information," for the purposes of this subsection, means books, pamphlets,
reports, and other materials prepared, published, or distributed at substantial
cost, a substantial purpose of which is to influence the passage or defeat of
any legislation. The state auditor in his or her regular examination of each
agency under chapter 43.09 RCW shall review the rules, accounts, and reports
and make appropriate findings, comments, and recommendations in his or her
examination reports concerning those agencies;

(10) After hearing, by
order approved and ratified by a majority of the membership of the commission,
suspend or modify any of the reporting requirements of this chapter in a
particular case if it finds that literal application of this chapter works a
manifestly unreasonable hardship and if it also finds that the suspension or
modification will not frustrate the purposes of the chapter. The commission shall
find that a manifestly unreasonable hardship exists if reporting the name of an
entity required to be reported under RCW 42.17.241(1)(g)(ii) would be likely to
adversely affect the competitive position of any entity in which the person
filing the report or any member of his or her immediate family holds any
office, directorship, general partnership interest, or an ownership interest of
ten percent or more. Any suspension or modification shall be only to the
extent necessary to substantially relieve the hardship. The commission shall
act to suspend or modify any reporting requirements only if it determines that
facts exist that are clear and convincing proof of the findings required under
this section. Requests for renewals of reporting modifications may be heard in
a brief adjudicative proceeding as set forth in RCW 34.05.482 through 34.05.494
and in accordance with the standards established in this section. No initial
request may be heard in a brief adjudicative proceeding and no request for
renewal may be heard in a brief adjudicative proceeding if the initial request
was granted more than three years previously or if the applicant is holding an
office or position of employment different from the office or position held
when the initial request was granted. The commission shall adopt
administrative rules governing the proceedings. Any citizen has standing to
bring an action in Thurston county superior court to contest the propriety of
any order entered under this section within one year from the date of the entry
of the order; and

(11) Revise, at least
once every five years but no more often than every two years, the monetary
reporting thresholds and reporting code values of this chapter. The revisions
shall be only for the purpose of recognizing economic changes as reflected by
an inflationary index recommended by the office of financial management. The
revisions shall be guided by the change in the index for the period commencing
with the month of December preceding the last revision and concluding with the
month of December preceding the month the revision is adopted. As to each of
the three general categories of this chapter (reports of campaign finance,
reports of lobbyist activity, and reports of the financial affairs of elected
and appointed officials), the revisions shall equally affect all thresholds
within each category, with the exception of occupation and employer
reporting required by RCW 42.17.090(1)(b), which is exempt from the revisions.
Revisions shall be adopted as rules under chapter 34.05 RCW. The first
revision authorized by this subsection shall reflect economic changes from the
time of the last legislative enactment affecting the respective code or
threshold through December 1985;

(12)
Develop and provide to filers a system for certification of reports required
under this chapter which are transmitted by facsimile or electronically to the
commission. Implementation of the program is contingent on the availability of
funds.

---
END ---