BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF
WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec.
1. The legislature finds
that the use of outcome and performance measures is necessary for demonstrating
the accountability of state government to the public. The legislature also
finds that performance measurement is integral to the efficient and effective
management and operation of state agencies and programs. Thus, the legislature
intends to expand its review of these measures to provide greater
accountability to the public and to ensure that state government has effective
systems for assessing performance.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
2. A new section is added
to chapter 44.28 RCW to read as follows:

(1) The joint legislative
audit and review committee shall conduct audits of the performance and outcome
measures of state agencies and programs that have significant fiscal or program
impacts, represent major policy issues facing the state, or otherwise have
compelling public interest. In identifying the state agencies or programs for
audits, the joint committee shall consult with appropriate fiscal and policy
standing committees of the legislature. These audits of performance and
outcome measures shall eventually include all agencies of state government. In
conducting the audits, the joint committee shall work in cooperation with the
office of financial management and state agency personnel.

(2) The joint committee
shall develop a schedule and common methodology for conducting these audits.
The audits shall include, but not be limited to, the following:

(a) Determine whether
the performance and outcome measures are consistent with legislative mandates,
strategic plans, mission statements, and goals and objectives;

(b) Examine how agency
management uses the measures to manage resources in an efficient and effective
manner;

(c) Assess how
performance benchmarks are established for the purpose of assessing overall
performance compared to external standards and benchmarks;

(d) Assess how customer
satisfaction, both internal and external, is integrated with performance and
outcome measures to make operational improvements;

(e) Examine how an
analysis of the measurement data is used to make planning and operational
improvements;

(f) Determine how
performance and outcome measures are used in the budget planning, development,
and allotment processes;

(g) Review how
performance data are reported to and used by the legislature;

(h) Assess whether the
performance measure data are reliable and collected in a uniform and timely
manner; and

(i) Make
recommendations as necessary.

(3) Completed
performance measure audits shall be presented to the joint committee and
published in the same manner as prescribed for performance audits in RCW
44.28.088. Final reports shall also be transmitted to the appropriate policy
and fiscal standing committees of the legislature.

(4) The joint committee
shall complete audits of the performance and outcome measures for the
department of social and health services, the department of ecology, and the
office of the superintendent of public instruction by June 30, 2003, and shall
present to the policy and fiscal committees of the legislature, by June 30,
2003, and assessment of the results of these audits. In addition to results,
this assessment shall include recommendations on how the review process might
be improved, and options for extending the review process to other agencies and
programs, through the joint committee's biennial work plans.

(5) The joint
legislative audit and review committee shall develop an implementation plan to
complete audits of all government agencies and report this plan to the
legislature no later than January 31, 2003. Recommendations on how the review
process might be improved shall be included in the plan.

(6) The joint committee
may consult with or contract with public and private independent and technical
experts as necessary in implementing the duties identified in this section.

(7) For purposes of
this section, "state agencies" includes all elected state executive
officials and all departments, divisions, boards, commissions, and institutions
of the executive branch of state government.

Sec. 3. RCW 44.28.071 and 1996 c
288 s 9 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) In conducting
performance audits and other reviews, the legislative auditor shall work
closely with the chairs and staff of standing committees of the senate and
house of representatives, and may work in consultation with the state auditor
and the director of financial management.

(2) The legislative
auditor may contract with and consult with public and private independent
professional and technical experts as necessary in conducting the performance
audits. The legislative auditor should also involve front-line employees and
internal auditors in the performance audit process to the highest possible
degree.

(3) The legislative
auditor shall work with the legislative evaluation and accountability program
committee and the office of financial management to develop information system
capabilities necessary for the performance audit requirements of this chapter.

(4) The legislative
auditor shall work with the ((legislative office of performance review and
the)) office of financial management to facilitate the implementation of
effective performance measures throughout state government. In agencies and
programs where effective systems for performance measurement exist, the
measurements incorporated into those systems should be a basis for performance
audits conducted under this chapter.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 4. This act takes effect
July 1, 2002.

---
END ---