BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF
WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1. RCW 16.52.185 and 1994 c
261 s 22 are each amended to read as follows:

((Nothing in)) This
chapter ((applies)) does not apply to accepted husbandry
practices used in the commercial raising or slaughtering of livestock or poultry,
or products thereof or to the use of animals in the normal and usual course of
rodeo events or to the customary use or exhibiting of animals in normal and
usual events at fairs as defined in RCW 15.76.120.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
2. A new section is added
to chapter 16.52 RCW to read as follows:

(1) The definitions in
this subsection apply throughout this section unless the context clearly
requires otherwise.

(a)
"Director" means the director of the department of agriculture or the
director's representative.

(b) "Laying
hen" means a female chicken kept for commercial egg production.

(2)(a) The director has
the authority to conduct inspections, and shall establish a program for
conducting inspections, of facilities in which one hundred or more laying hens
are kept, for the purpose of determining whether the practices of the owners of
the facilities are conforming to accepted husbandry practices in the commercial
raising of poultry or poultry products. In making this determination, the
director shall consider whether the practice complies with the generally
accepted poultry industry standards applicable to laying hens. The director
shall develop and maintain a list of facilities to be inspected from
information the department of agriculture receives from persons licensed under
chapter 69.25 RCW. To the degree practicable, the inspections must be
unannounced. Inspections under this section may not be conducted by animal
control officers. The inspection program required under this section shall be
conducted only to the extent that funds are available within existing funding
levels. The director shall coordinate the inspection program under this
section with any existing inspection programs currently required under chapter 69.25
RCW or any egg production or processing inspections currently required by the
federal government.

(b) If the director
finds evidence of a practice by an owner of a facility where one hundred or
more laying hens are kept that is not an accepted husbandry practice as
determined under (a) of this subsection, and that violates a provision of this
chapter, the director shall record evidence of the violation and report the
violation to the prosecuting attorney of the county in which the violation has
occurred. This section may not be construed as providing exclusive authority
to the director to investigate such a violation of this chapter regarding
laying hens.

(c) Any
practice that the director determines under this section is not an accepted
husbandry practice in the commercial raising of poultry or poultry products is
not exempted from the provisions of this chapter.

---
END ---