BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF
WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1. RCW 46.20.095 and 1999 c
6 s 15 are each amended to read as follows:

The department's
instructional publications for drivers must include information on:

(1) The proper use of
the left-hand lane by motor vehicles on multilane highways; ((and))

(2) Bicyclists' and
pedestrians' rights and responsibilities; and

(3)
Information on litter prevention including, but not limited to, the
prohibitions and penalties for failing to carry a litter bag in a vehicle under
chapter 70.93 RCW, for failing to secure loads under RCW 46.61.655, and for
throwing dangerous materials on the roadway under RCW 46.61.645.

--- END ---