BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF
WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1. RCW 67.70.010 and 1994 c
218 s 3 are each amended to read as follows:

For the purposes of
this chapter:

(1)
"Commission" means the state lottery commission established by this
chapter;

(2)
"Director" means the director of the state lottery established by
this chapter;

(3) "Lottery"
or "state lottery" means the lottery established and operated
pursuant to this chapter;

(4) "On-line
game" means a lottery game in which a player pays a fee to a lottery
retailer and selects a combination of digits, numbers, or symbols, type and
amount of play, and receives a computer-generated ticket with those selections,
and the lottery separately draws or selects the winning combination or
combinations;

(5)
"Shared game lottery" means any lottery activity in which the
commission participates under written agreement between the commission, on
behalf of the state, and any other state or states.

Sec. 2. RCW 67.70.040 and 1994 c
218 s 4 are each amended to read as follows:

The commission shall
have the power, and it shall be its duty:

(1) To promulgate such
rules governing the establishment and operation of a state lottery as it deems
necessary and desirable in order that such a lottery be initiated at the
earliest feasible and practicable time, and in order that such lottery produce
the maximum amount of net revenues for the state consonant with the dignity of
the state and the general welfare of the people. Such rules shall include, but
shall not be limited to, the following:

(a) The type of lottery
to be conducted which may include the selling of tickets or shares. The use of
electronic or mechanical devices or video terminals which allow for individual
play against such devices or terminals shall be prohibited((. Approval of
the legislature shall be required before entering any agreement with other
state lotteries to conduct shared games));

(b) The price, or
prices, of tickets or shares in the lottery;

(c) The numbers and
sizes of the prizes on the winning tickets or shares;

(d) The manner of
selecting the winning tickets or shares;

(e) The manner and time
of payment of prizes to the holder of winning tickets or shares which, at the
director's option, may be paid in lump sum amounts or installments over a
period of years;

(f) The frequency of
the drawings or selections of winning tickets or shares. Approval of the legislature
is required before conducting any on-line game in which the drawing or
selection of winning tickets occurs more frequently than once every twenty-four
hours;

(g) Without limit as to
number, the type or types of locations at which tickets or shares may be sold;

(h) The method to be
used in selling tickets or shares;

(i) The licensing of
agents to sell or distribute tickets or shares, except that a person under the
age of eighteen shall not be licensed as an agent;

(j) The manner and
amount of compensation, if any, to be paid licensed sales agents necessary to
provide for the adequate availability of tickets or shares to prospective
buyers and for the convenience of the public;

(k) The apportionment
of the total revenues accruing from the sale of lottery tickets or shares and
from all other sources among: (i) The payment of prizes to the holders of
winning tickets or shares, which shall not be less than forty-five percent of
the gross annual revenue from such lottery, (ii) transfers to the lottery
administrative account created by RCW 67.70.260, and (iii) transfer to the
state's general fund. Transfers to the state general fund shall be made in
compliance with RCW 43.01.050;

(l) Such other matters
necessary or desirable for the efficient and economical operation and
administration of the lottery and for the convenience of the purchasers of
tickets or shares and the holders of winning tickets or shares.

(2) To ensure that in
each place authorized to sell lottery tickets or shares, on the back of the
ticket or share, and in any advertising or promotion there shall be
conspicuously displayed an estimate of the probability of purchasing a winning
ticket.

(3) To amend, repeal,
or supplement any such rules from time to time as it deems necessary or
desirable.

(4) To advise and make
recommendations to the director for the operation and administration of the
lottery.

(5) To enter into
agreements with one or more states for the purpose of creating and maintaining
a shared game lottery.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
3. A new section is added
to chapter 67.70 RCW to read as follows:

The shared game lottery
account is created as a separate account outside the state treasury. The
account is managed, maintained, and controlled by the commission and consists
of all revenues received from the sale of shared game lottery tickets or
shares, and all other moneys credited or transferred to it from any other fund
or source under law. The account is allotted according to chapter 43.88 RCW.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
4. A new section is added
to chapter 67.70 RCW to read as follows:

(1) The legislature
recognizes that creating a shared game lottery could result in less revenue
being raised by the existing state lottery ticket sales. The legislature
further recognizes that the two funds most impacted by this potential event are
the student achievement fund and the education construction account.
Therefore, it is the intent of the legislature to use some of the proceeds from
the shared game lottery to make up the difference that the potential state
lottery revenue loss would have on the student achievement fund and the
education construction account.

(2) The student
achievement fund and the education construction account are expected to
collectively receive one hundred two million dollars annually from state
lottery games other than the shared game lottery. For fiscal year 2003 and
thereafter, if the amount of lottery revenues earmarked for the student
achievement fund and the education construction account are less than one
hundred two million dollars, the commission must transfer sufficient moneys
from revenues derived from the shared game lottery into the student achievement
fund and the education construction account to bring the total revenue up to
one hundred two million dollars. The funds transferred from the shared game
lottery account under this subsection must be divided between the student
achievement fund and the education construction account in a manner consistent
with RCW 67.70.240(3).

(3) For fiscal year
2003 and thereafter, the commission must transfer from revenues derived from
the shared game lottery to the division of alcohol and substance abuse in the
department of social and health services one million dollars, or as much
thereof as may be necessary, for the treatment of pathological gamblers as
prescribed by section 5 of this act.

(4) For fiscal year
2003 and thereafter, the commission must transfer from revenues derived from
the shared game lottery to the Washington state gambling commission five
hundred thousand dollars, or as much thereof as may be necessary, for use in
problem gambling prevention, youth education, public awareness, training, and
helpline services.

(5) The remaining net
revenues, if any, in the shared game lottery account after the transfers must
be deposited into the general fund.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
5. A new section is added
to chapter 67.70 RCW to read as follows:

(1) A program for the
treatment of pathological gambling is established within the department of
social and health services, to be administered by a qualified person who has
training and experience in handling pathological gambling problems or the
organization and administration of treatment services for persons suffering
from pathological gambling problems.

(2) To receive
treatment under subsection (1) of this section, a person must:

(a) Need treatment for
pathological gambling, but be unable to afford treatment; and

(b) Be targeted by the
department of social and health services as to be most amenable to treatment.

(3) Treatment under
this section is limited to the funds available to the department of social and
health services.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 6. Starting for fiscal year
2008 and thereafter, the proceeds from the shared game lottery shall be
deposited into the Washington promise scholarship account established by House
Bill 2807 (2002) and distributed in a manner consistent with statute. If House
Bill 2807 (2002) is not enacted, this section shall be null and void.

---
END ---