BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF
WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec.
1. The legislature finds
that the state parks and recreation commission, the department of natural
resources, and the fish and wildlife commission have difficulty maintaining
recreation sites they own because of insufficient funds. These recreation
sites are enjoyed not only for family outings, but also by a wide variety of
groups including youth organizations, hunters, fishers, horsemen, hikers, bikers,
people who view wildlife, and other outdoor recreation groups. The legislature
finds that the lack of funds to maintain and repair these recreation sites may
result in the closure of some of these sites to the public at a time when the
demand for outdoor recreation areas continues to increase.

The legislature
recognizes that many state residents enjoy visiting state-owned recreation
sites throughout different parts of the state, and that people will frequent
lands owned by more than one state agency. The legislature is aware that
although the parks and recreation commission and the department of natural
resources currently do not charge a day-use fee at their recreation sites,
there is a possibility that these fees may be imposed at some future date. The
legislature finds that any day-use permits or passes should be coordinated
between these agencies and the current vehicle use permit required by the
department of fish and wildlife so that people have the opportunity to buy a
single day-use recreation pass that will be accepted at recreation sites owned
by all three of these state agencies. The legislature also finds that the
creation of a single renewable annual recreation pass may result in many more
people visiting a number of recreation sites within the state because of better
maintained facilities and increased awareness of recreation opportunities. It
is therefore the intent of the legislature to create an evergreen recreation
pass that will be available to serve as a renewable annual recreation pass for
state-owned recreation sites in lieu of day-use fees, that this recreation pass
will be widely available, and that purchase of this pass is optional for
members of the general public.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
2. The department of fish
and wildlife, the department of natural resources, the state parks and
recreation commission, and the interagency committee for outdoor recreation, in
coordination with affected stakeholder groups, must develop a legislative
proposal for the implementation of an evergreen recreation pass. The task
force must evaluate:

(1) The feasibility of
combining various existing permits and licenses into an evergreen recreation
pass;

(2) Methods of
marketing an evergreen recreation pass, including sponsorship opportunities;

(3) The types of
activities that could be included within an evergreen recreation pass;

(4) Potential methods
of distributing revenue generated by an evergreen recreation pass;

(5) The dedication of
proceeds from an evergreen recreation pass to maintenance and repair of
recreation sites;

(6) The impact an
evergreen recreation pass would have on use and access to recreation sites;

(7) The need for
immunity from recreational liability for involved public entities;

(8) Methods of
enforcing an evergreen recreation pass;

(9) Potential revenue
that could be generated by an evergreen recreation pass, and the cost of
statewide implementation; and

(10) Other
issues related to the development and implementation of an evergreen recreation
pass. The task force recommendations must be submitted to the appropriate
committees of the legislature by December 1, 2002.

---
END ---