BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF
WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec.
1. The legislature finds
that many workers do not have access to an employment-based retirement plan.
Workers who are unable to build up pensions and savings risk living on low
incomes in their old age and are more likely to become dependent on state
services. The Washington voluntary accounts program will provide employers a
simple and inexpensive way to offer an employee benefit. These accounts will provide
tax incentives for workers and employers, if they participate.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
2. The definitions in this
section apply throughout this chapter unless the context clearly requires
otherwise.

(1) "Program"
means the Washington voluntary accounts program created under section 3 of this
act.

(2)
"Director" means the director of the department of retirement
systems.

(3) "Participating
employee" means any employee in this state employed by a participating
employer, if that employee chooses to participate in the program.

(4) "Participating
employer" means any private employer, with a place of business in this
state, that chooses to participate in the program for the benefit of its
employees in this state.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
3. The Washington voluntary
accounts program is created. The director may adopt rules as necessary to
implement this chapter.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
4. (1) Each participating
employer is authorized to contract with a participating employee to defer a
portion of that employee's income, in accordance with the internal revenue
service code.

(2) Participating
employees shall self-direct the investment of the deferred portion of their
income through the selection of investment options as set forth in subsection
(3) of this section.

(3) The director may
provide those plans determined to be in the interests of participating
employees. In addition to the types of investments described in this section,
the state investment board, with respect to the program, shall invest the
deferred portion of participating employees' income, without limitation as to amount,
in accordance with RCW 43.84.150, 43.33A.140, and 41.50.780, and pursuant to
investment policy established by the state investment board for the program.
The state investment board shall provide a set of options for participants to
choose from for investment of the deferred portion of their income.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
5. (1) The Washington
voluntary accounts program principal account is created in the state treasury.

(2) The amount of
compensation deferred by participating employees under agreements entered into
under section 3 of this act shall be paid into the Washington voluntary
accounts program principal account and shall be sufficient to cover costs of
administration and staffing in addition to such other amounts as determined by
the director. The account shall be used to carry out the purposes of this
chapter. Private employers shall cooperate with the department in providing
employees with the opportunity to participate.

(3) All moneys in the
Washington voluntary accounts program principal account and the Washington
voluntary accounts program administrative account, all property and rights
purchased therewith, and all income attributable thereto, shall be held in
trust by the state investment board, as set forth under RCW 43.33A.030, for the
exclusive benefit of the Washington voluntary accounts program participants and
their beneficiaries. Neither the employee participant, nor the employee
participant's beneficiary or beneficiaries, nor any other designee, has any
right to commute, sell, assign, transfer, or otherwise convey the right to
receive any payments under the program. These payments and rights are
nonassignable and nontransferable. Unpaid accumulated deferrals are not
subject to attachment, garnishment, or execution and are not transferable by
operation of law in event of bankruptcy or insolvency, except to the extent
otherwise required by law.

(4) The state
investment board has the full power to invest moneys in the Washington
voluntary accounts program principal account and the Washington voluntary
accounts program administrative account in accordance with RCW 43.84.150,
43.33A.140, and 41.50.770, and cumulative investment directions received under
this chapter. All investment and operating costs of the state investment board
associated with the investment of the program assets shall be paid under RCW
43.33A.160 and 43.84.160. With the exception of these expenses, one hundred
percent of all earnings from these investments shall accrue directly to the
Washington voluntary accounts program principal account.

(5)(a) No state board,
commission, or agency, or any officer, employee, or member is liable for any
loss or deficiency resulting from participant investments selected under this
chapter.

(b) The state
investment board, or any officer, employee, or member is not liable for any
loss or deficiency resulting from reasonable efforts to implement investment
directions under this chapter.

(6) The Washington
voluntary accounts program administrative account is created in the state
treasury. All expenses of the department pertaining to the Washington
voluntary accounts program including staffing and administrative expenses shall
be paid out of the Washington voluntary accounts program administrative account.
Any excess balances credited to this account over administrative expenses
disbursed from this account shall be transferred to the Washington voluntary
accounts program principal account at such time and in such amounts as may be
determined by the director with the approval of the director of financial
management. Any deficiency in the Washington voluntary accounts program
administrative account caused by an excess of administrative expenses disbursed
from this account shall be transferred to this account from the Washington
voluntary accounts program principal account.

(7)(a)(i) The director
shall keep or cause to be kept full and adequate accounts and records of the
assets of each individual participant, obligations, transactions, and affairs
of the program. The department shall account for and report on the investment
of program assets or may enter into an agreement with the state investment
board for accounting and reporting.

(ii) The director's
duties related to individual participant accounts include conducting the
activities of trade instruction, settlement activities, and direction of cash
movement and related wire transfers with the custodian bank and outside
investment firms.

(iii) The director has
sole responsibility for contracting with any recordkeepers for individual
participant accounts and shall manage the performance of recordkeepers under
those contracts.

(b)(i) The director's
duties under (a)(ii) of this subsection do not limit the authority of the state
investment board to conduct its responsibilities for asset management and
balancing of program funds.

(ii) The state
investment board has sole responsibility for contracting with outside
investment firms to provide investment management for program funds and shall
manage the performance of investment managers under those contracts.

(c) The state treasurer
shall designate and define the terms of engagement for the custodial banks.

Sec. 6. RCW 43.84.092 and 2001
2nd sp.s. c 14 s 608, 2001 c 273 s 6, 2001 c 141 s 3, and 2001 c 80 s 5 are
each reenacted and amended to read as follows:

(1) All earnings of
investments of surplus balances in the state treasury shall be deposited to the
treasury income account, which account is hereby established in the state
treasury.

(2) The treasury income
account shall be utilized to pay or receive funds associated with federal
programs as required by the federal cash management improvement act of 1990.
The treasury income account is subject in all respects to chapter 43.88 RCW,
but no appropriation is required for refunds or allocations of interest earnings
required by the cash management improvement act. Refunds of interest to the
federal treasury required under the cash management improvement act fall under
RCW 43.88.180 and shall not require appropriation. The office of financial
management shall determine the amounts due to or from the federal government
pursuant to the cash management improvement act. The office of financial
management may direct transfers of funds between accounts as deemed necessary
to implement the provisions of the cash management improvement act, and this
subsection. Refunds or allocations shall occur prior to the distributions of
earnings set forth in subsection (4) of this section.

(3) Except for the
provisions of RCW 43.84.160, the treasury income account may be utilized for
the payment of purchased banking services on behalf of treasury funds
including, but not limited to, depository, safekeeping, and disbursement
functions for the state treasury and affected state agencies. The treasury
income account is subject in all respects to chapter 43.88 RCW, but no
appropriation is required for payments to financial institutions. Payments
shall occur prior to distribution of earnings set forth in subsection (4) of
this section.

(4) Monthly, the state
treasurer shall distribute the earnings credited to the treasury income
account. The state treasurer shall credit the general fund with all the
earnings credited to the treasury income account except:

(a) The following
accounts and funds shall receive their proportionate share of earnings based
upon each account's and fund's average daily balance for the period: The
capitol building construction account, the Cedar River channel construction and
operation account, the Central Washington University capital projects account,
the charitable, educational, penal and reformatory institutions account, the
common school construction fund, the county criminal justice assistance
account, the county sales and use tax equalization account, the data processing
building construction account, the deferred compensation administrative
account, the deferred compensation principal account, the department of
retirement systems expense account, the drinking water assistance account, the
drinking water assistance administrative account, the drinking water assistance
repayment account, the Eastern Washington University capital projects account,
the education construction fund, the emergency reserve fund, the federal forest
revolving account, the health services account, the public health services
account, the health system capacity account, the personal health services
account, the state higher education construction account, the higher education
construction account, the highway infrastructure account, the industrial
insurance premium refund account, the judges' retirement account, the judicial
retirement administrative account, the judicial retirement principal account,
the local leasehold excise tax account, the local real estate excise tax
account, the local sales and use tax account, the medical aid account, the
mobile home park relocation fund, the multimodal transportation account, the
municipal criminal justice assistance account, the municipal sales and use tax
equalization account, the natural resources deposit account, the oyster reserve
land account, the perpetual surveillance and maintenance account, the public
employees' retirement system plan 1 account, the public employees' retirement
system combined plan 2 and plan 3 account, the public health supplemental
account, the Puyallup tribal settlement account, the resource management cost
account, the site closure account, the special wildlife account, the state
employees' insurance account, the state employees' insurance reserve account,
the state investment board expense account, the state investment board
commingled trust fund accounts, the supplemental pension account, the teachers'
retirement system plan 1 account, the teachers' retirement system combined plan
2 and plan 3 account, the tobacco prevention and control account, the tobacco
settlement account, the transportation infrastructure account, the tuition
recovery trust fund, the University of Washington bond retirement fund, the
University of Washington building account, the volunteer fire fighters' and
reserve officers' relief and pension principal fund, the volunteer fire
fighters' and reserve officers' administrative fund, the Washington fruit
express account, the Washington judicial retirement system account, the
Washington law enforcement officers' and fire fighters' system plan 1 retirement
account, the Washington law enforcement officers' and fire fighters' system
plan 2 retirement account, the Washington school employees' retirement system
combined plan 2 and 3 account, the Washington state health insurance pool
account, the Washington state patrol retirement account, the Washington State
University building account, the Washington State University bond retirement
fund, the Washington voluntary accounts program administrative account, the
Washington voluntary accounts program principal account, the water
pollution control revolving fund, and the Western Washington University capital
projects account. Earnings derived from investing balances of the agricultural
permanent fund, the normal school permanent fund, the permanent common school
fund, the scientific permanent fund, and the state university permanent fund
shall be allocated to their respective beneficiary accounts. All earnings to
be distributed under this subsection (4)(a) shall first be reduced by the
allocation to the state treasurer's service fund pursuant to RCW 43.08.190.

(b) The following
accounts and funds shall receive eighty percent of their proportionate share of
earnings based upon each account's or fund's average daily balance for the
period: The aeronautics account, the aircraft search and rescue account, the
county arterial preservation account, the department of licensing services
account, the essential rail assistance account, the ferry bond retirement fund,
the grade crossing protective fund, the high capacity transportation account,
the highway bond retirement fund, the highway safety account, the motor vehicle
fund, the motorcycle safety education account, the pilotage account, the public
transportation systems account, the Puget Sound capital construction account,
the Puget Sound ferry operations account, the recreational vehicle account, the
rural arterial trust account, the safety and education account, the special
category C account, the state patrol highway account, the transportation
equipment fund, the transportation fund, the transportation improvement
account, the transportation improvement board bond retirement account, and the
urban arterial trust account.

(5) In conformance with
Article II, section 37 of the state Constitution, no treasury accounts or funds
shall be allocated earnings without the specific affirmative directive of this
section.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 7. Sections 1 through 5 of
this act constitute a new chapter in Title 41 RCW.

---
END ---