BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF
WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec.
1. A new section is added
to chapter 82.04 RCW to read as follows:

This chapter does not
apply to amounts received by any person for research and development under the
federal small business technology transfer program (115 Stat. 263; 15 U.S.C.
Sec. 638 et seq.).

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 2. This act takes effect
January 1, 2003.

---
END ---