BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF
WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec.
1. A well‑trained work
force is critical to the economic and social vitality of the state of Washington.
Studies of the state's work force highlight population trends that, without a
concerted effort to offset them, will lead to an inadequate supply of skilled
workers in the construction industry. Apprenticeship training programs are
particularly effective in providing training and experience to individuals
seeking to enter or advance in the work force. Public works contracts can
provide training and experience as a means to increase the skills of the
state's work force and to help apprentices become journeyworkers.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
2. The definitions in this
section apply throughout sections 1 through 3 of this act unless the context
clearly requires otherwise.

(1)
"Apprentice" means an apprentice enrolled in a state‑approved
apprenticeship training program.

(2) "Apprentice
utilization requirement" means the requirement that the appropriate
percentage of labor hours be performed by apprentices.

(3) "Labor
hours" means the total hours of workers receiving an hourly wage who are
directly employed on the site of the public works project. "Labor
hours" includes hours performed by workers employed by the contractor and
all subcontractors working on the project. "Labor hours" does not
include hours worked by foremen, superintendents, owners, and workers who are
not subject to prevailing wage requirements.

(4) "State‑approved
apprenticeship training program" means an apprenticeship training program
approved by the Washington state apprenticeship council.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
3. (1) From July 1, 2002,
through December 31, 2002, all contracts for public works estimated to cost two
million dollars or more shall require that no less than ten percent of the
labor hours be performed by apprentices.

(2) From January 1,
2003, through December 31, 2003, all contracts for public works estimated to
cost two million dollars or more shall require that no less than twelve percent
of the labor hours be performed by apprentices.

(3) From January 1,
2004, and thereafter, all contracts for public works estimated to cost one
million dollars or more shall require that no less than fifteen percent of the
labor hours be performed by apprentices.

(4) Awarding agency
directors shall adjust the requirements of this section for a specific project
for the following reasons:

(a) The lack of
availability of apprentices in specific geographic areas, demonstrated by a
failure of solicitations sufficient to fill the jobs needed. The contractor
may apply for an adjustment under this subsection (4)(a) after the employment
solicitations have been insufficient for thirty days after the initiation of
work under the public works contract;

(b) A
disproportionately high ratio of material costs to labor hours, which does not
make feasible the required minimum levels of apprentice participation;

(c) Participating
contractors have demonstrated a good faith effort to comply with the
requirements of this act; or

(d) Other criteria the
awarding agency director deems appropriate, which is subject to prior review by
the apprenticeship program manager of the department of labor and industries.

(5) A contractor must
make reasonable efforts to apply the apprentice utilization percentage
requirements listed in subsections (1) through (3) of this section so that the
appropriate percentage of labor hours in each separate craft or trade is
performed by apprentices in that craft or trade.

(6) This section
applies only to public works contracts awarded by the state and the
institutions of higher education as defined in RCW 28B.10.016. However, this
section does not apply to contracts awarded by state agencies headed by a
separately elected public official and the department of transportation.

(7)(a) The department
of general administration must provide information and technical assistance to
affected agencies and collect the following data from affected agencies for
each project covered by this section:

(i) The number of apprentices
and labor hours worked by them, categorized by trade or craft;

(ii) The number of
journey-level workers and labor hours worked by them, categorized by trade or
craft; and

(iii) The number, type,
and rationale for the exceptions granted under subsection (4) of this section.

(b) By January 1, 2003,
and each year thereafter, the department of general administration shall
compile and summarize the agency data and provide reports to the senate labor,
commerce and financial institutions committee, the house commerce and labor
committee, or their successor committees, and the governor. The report shall
include recommendations on modifications or improvements to the apprentice
utilization program.

(8) By January 1, 2003,
and each year thereafter, the department of labor and industries must report to
the senate labor, commerce and financial institutions committee, the house
commerce and labor committee, or their successor committees, and the governor
on skill shortages in each trade or craft.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 4. Sections 1 through 3 of
this act are each added to chapter 39.04 RCW.

---
END ---