BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF
WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1. RCW 9.46.070 and 1999 c
143 s 6 are each amended to read as follows:

The commission shall
have the following powers and duties:

(1) To authorize and
issue licenses for a period not to exceed one year to bona fide charitable or
nonprofit organizations approved by the commission meeting the requirements of
this chapter and any rules and regulations adopted pursuant thereto permitting
said organizations to conduct bingo games, raffles, amusement games, and social
card games, to utilize punch boards and pull-tabs in accordance with the
provisions of this chapter and any rules and regulations adopted pursuant
thereto and to revoke or suspend said licenses for violation of any provisions
of this chapter or any rules and regulations adopted pursuant thereto:
PROVIDED, That the commission shall not deny a license to an otherwise
qualified applicant in an effort to limit the number of licenses to be issued:
PROVIDED FURTHER, That the commission or director shall not issue, deny,
suspend, or revoke any license because of considerations of race, sex, creed,
color, or national origin: AND PROVIDED FURTHER, That the commission may
authorize the director to temporarily issue or suspend licenses subject to
final action by the commission;

(2) To authorize and
issue licenses for a period not to exceed one year to any person, association,
or organization operating a business primarily engaged in the selling of items
of food or drink for consumption on the premises, approved by the commission
meeting the requirements of this chapter and any rules and regulations adopted
pursuant thereto permitting said person, association, or organization to
utilize punch boards and pull-tabs and to conduct social card games as a
commercial stimulant in accordance with the provisions of this chapter and any
rules and regulations adopted pursuant thereto and to revoke or suspend said
licenses for violation of any provisions of this chapter and any rules and
regulations adopted pursuant thereto: PROVIDED, That the commission shall not
deny a license to an otherwise qualified applicant in an effort to limit the
number of licenses to be issued: PROVIDED FURTHER, That the commission may
authorize the director to temporarily issue or suspend licenses subject to
final action by the commission;

(3) To authorize and
issue licenses for a period not to exceed one year to any person, association,
or organization approved by the commission meeting the requirements of this
chapter and meeting the requirements of any rules and regulations adopted by
the commission pursuant to this chapter as now or hereafter amended, permitting
said person, association, or organization to conduct or operate amusement games
in such manner and at such locations as the commission may determine;

(4) To authorize,
require, and issue, for a period not to exceed one year, such licenses as the
commission may by rule provide, to any person, association, or organization to
engage in the selling, distributing, or otherwise supplying or in the
manufacturing of devices for use within this state for those activities
authorized by this chapter;

(5) To establish a
schedule of annual license fees for carrying on specific gambling activities
upon the premises, and for such other activities as may be licensed by the
commission, which fees shall provide to the commission not less than an amount
of money adequate to cover all costs incurred by the commission relative to licensing
under this chapter and the enforcement by the commission of the provisions of
this chapter and rules and regulations adopted pursuant thereto: PROVIDED,
That all licensing fees shall be submitted with an application therefor and
such portion of said fee as the commission may determine, based upon its cost
of processing and investigation, shall be retained by the commission upon the
withdrawal or denial of any such license application as its reasonable expense
for processing the application and investigation into the granting thereof:
PROVIDED FURTHER, That if in a particular case the basic license fee
established by the commission for a particular class of license is less than
the commission's actual expenses to investigate that particular application,
the commission may at any time charge to that applicant such additional fees as
are necessary to pay the commission for those costs. The commission may
decline to proceed with its investigation and no license shall be issued until
the commission has been fully paid therefor by the applicant: AND PROVIDED
FURTHER, That the commission may establish fees for the furnishing by it to
licensees of identification stamps to be affixed to such devices and equipment
as required by the commission and for such other special services or programs
required or offered by the commission, the amount of each of these fees to be
not less than is adequate to offset the cost to the commission of the stamps
and of administering their dispersal to licensees or the cost of administering
such other special services, requirements or programs;

(6) To prescribe the
manner and method of payment of taxes, fees and penalties to be paid to or
collected by the commission;

(7) To require that
applications for all licenses contain such information as may be required by
the commission: PROVIDED, That all persons (a) having a managerial or
ownership interest in any gambling activity, or the building in which any
gambling activity occurs, or the equipment to be used for any gambling activity,
or (b) participating as an employee in the operation of any gambling activity,
shall be listed on the application for the license and the applicant shall
certify on the application, under oath, that the persons named on the
application are all of the persons known to have an interest in any gambling
activity, building, or equipment by the person making such application:
PROVIDED FURTHER, That the commission ((may)) shall require
fingerprinting and national criminal history background checks on any persons
seeking licenses, certifications, or permits under this chapter or of
any person holding an interest in any gambling activity, building, or equipment
to be used therefor, or of any person participating as an employee in the
operation of any gambling activity. All national criminal history
background checks shall be conducted using fingerprints submitted to the United
States department of justice-federal bureau of investigation. The commission
must establish rules to delineate which persons named on the application are
subject to national criminal history background checks. In identifying these
persons, the commission must take into consideration the nature, character,
size, and scope of the gambling activities requested by the persons making such
applications;

(8) To require that any
license holder maintain records as directed by the commission and submit such
reports as the commission may deem necessary;

(9) To require that all
income from bingo games, raffles, and amusement games be recorded and reported
as established by rule or regulation of the commission to the extent deemed
necessary by considering the scope and character of the gambling activity in
such a manner that will disclose gross income from any gambling activity,
amounts received from each player, the nature and value of prizes, and the fact
of distributions of such prizes to the winners thereof;

(10) To regulate and
establish maximum limitations on income derived from bingo. In establishing
limitations pursuant to this subsection the commission shall take into account
(i) the nature, character, and scope of the activities of the licensee; (ii)
the source of all other income of the licensee; and (iii) the percentage or
extent to which income derived from bingo is used for charitable, as
distinguished from nonprofit, purposes. However, the commission's powers and
duties granted by this subsection are discretionary and not mandatory;

(11) To regulate and
establish the type and scope of and manner of conducting the gambling
activities authorized by this chapter, including but not limited to, the extent
of wager, money, or other thing of value which may be wagered or contributed or
won by a player in any such activities;

(12) To regulate the
collection of and the accounting for the fee which may be imposed by an
organization, corporation, or person licensed to conduct a social card game on
a person desiring to become a player in a social card game in accordance with
RCW 9.46.0282;

(13) To cooperate with
and secure the cooperation of county, city, and other local or state agencies
in investigating any matter within the scope of its duties and
responsibilities;

(14) In accordance with
RCW 9.46.080, to adopt such rules and regulations as are deemed necessary to
carry out the purposes and provisions of this chapter. All rules and
regulations shall be adopted pursuant to the administrative procedure act,
chapter 34.05 RCW;

(15) To set forth for
the perusal of counties, city-counties, cities and towns, model ordinances by
which any legislative authority thereof may enter into the taxing of any
gambling activity authorized by this chapter;

(16) To establish and
regulate a maximum limit on salaries or wages which may be paid to persons
employed in connection with activities conducted by bona fide charitable or
nonprofit organizations and authorized by this chapter, where payment of such
persons is allowed, and to regulate and establish maximum limits for other
expenses in connection with such authorized activities, including but not
limited to rent or lease payments. However, the commissioner's powers and
duties granted by this subsection are discretionary and not mandatory.

In establishing these
maximum limits the commission shall take into account the amount of income
received, or expected to be received, from the class of activities to which the
limits will apply and the amount of money the games could generate for
authorized charitable or nonprofit purposes absent such expenses. The
commission may also take into account, in its discretion, other factors,
including but not limited to, the local prevailing wage scale and whether
charitable purposes are benefited by the activities;

(17) To authorize,
require, and issue for a period not to exceed one year such licenses or
permits, for which the commission may by rule provide, to any person to work
for any operator of any gambling activity authorized by this chapter in
connection with that activity, or any manufacturer, supplier, or distributor of
devices for those activities in connection with such business. The commission
shall not require that persons working solely as volunteers in an authorized
activity conducted by a bona fide charitable or bona fide nonprofit
organization, who receive no compensation of any kind for any purpose from that
organization, and who have no managerial or supervisory responsibility in
connection with that activity, be licensed to do such work. The commission may
require that licensees employing such unlicensed volunteers submit to the
commission periodically a list of the names, addresses, and dates of birth of
the volunteers. If any volunteer is not approved by the commission, the
commission may require that the licensee not allow that person to work in
connection with the licensed activity;

(18) To publish and
make available at the office of the commission or elsewhere to anyone
requesting it a list of the commission licensees, including the name, address,
type of license, and license number of each licensee;

(19) To establish
guidelines for determining what constitutes active membership in bona fide
nonprofit or charitable organizations for the purposes of this chapter; and

(20) To perform all
other matters and things necessary to carry out the purposes and provisions of
this chapter.

Sec. 2. RCW 66.08.030 and 1977
ex.s. c 115 s 1 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) For the purpose of
carrying into effect the provisions of this title according to their true
intent or of supplying any deficiency therein, the board may make such
regulations not inconsistent with the spirit of this title as are deemed
necessary or advisable. All regulations so made shall be a public record and
shall be filed in the office of the code reviser, and thereupon shall have the
same force and effect as if incorporated in this title. Such regulations,
together with a copy of this title, shall be published in pamphlets and shall
be distributed as directed by the board.

(2) Without thereby
limiting the generality of the provisions contained in subsection (1), it is
declared that the power of the board to make regulations in the manner set out
in that subsection shall extend to

(a) regulating the
equipment and management of stores and warehouses in which state liquor is sold
or kept, and prescribing the books and records to be kept therein and the
reports to be made thereon to the board;

(b) prescribing the
duties of the employees of the board, and regulating their conduct in the
discharge of their duties;

(c) governing the
purchase of liquor by the state and the furnishing of liquor to stores
established under this title;

(d) determining the
classes, varieties, and brands of liquor to be kept for sale at any store;

(e) prescribing,
subject to RCW 66.16.080, the hours during which the state liquor stores shall
be kept open for the sale of liquor;

(f) providing for the
issuing and distributing of price lists showing the price to be paid by
purchasers for each variety of liquor kept for sale under this title;

(g) prescribing an
official seal and official labels and stamps and determining the manner in
which they shall be attached to every package of liquor sold or sealed under
this title, including the prescribing of different official seals or different
official labels for different classes of liquor;

(h) providing for the
payment by the board in whole or in part of the carrying charges on liquor
shipped by freight or express;

(i) prescribing forms
to be used for purposes of this title or the regulations, and the terms and
conditions to be contained in permits and licenses issued under this title,
and the qualifications for receiving a permit or license issued under this
title, including a criminal history record information check. The board may
submit the criminal history record information check to the Washington state
patrol and to the identification division of the federal bureau of
investigation in order that these agencies may search their records for prior
arrests and convictions of the individual or individuals who filled out the
forms. The board shall require fingerprinting of any applicant whose criminal
history record information check is submitted to the federal bureau of
investigation;

(j) prescribing the
fees payable in respect of permits and licenses issued under this title for
which no fees are prescribed in this title, and prescribing the fees for
anything done or permitted to be done under the regulations;

(k) prescribing the
kinds and quantities of liquor which may be kept on hand by the holder of a
special permit for the purposes named in the permit, regulating the manner in
which the same shall be kept and disposed of, and providing for the inspection
of the same at any time at the instance of the board;

(l) regulating the sale
of liquor kept by the holders of licenses which entitle the holder to purchase
and keep liquor for sale;

(m) prescribing the
records of purchases or sales of liquor kept by the holders of licenses, and
the reports to be made thereon to the board, and providing for inspection of
the records so kept;

(n) prescribing the
kinds and quantities of liquor for which a prescription may be given, and the
number of prescriptions which may be given to the same patient within a stated
period;

(o) prescribing the
manner of giving and serving notices required by this title or the regulations,
where not otherwise provided for in this title;

(p) regulating premises
in which liquor is kept for export from the state, or from which liquor is
exported, prescribing the books and records to be kept therein and the reports
to be made thereon to the board, and providing for the inspection of the
premises and the books, records and the liquor so kept;

(q) prescribing the
conditions and qualifications requisite for the obtaining of club licenses and
the books and records to be kept and the returns to be made by clubs,
prescribing the manner of licensing clubs in any municipality or other
locality, and providing for the inspection of clubs;

(r) prescribing the
conditions, accommodations and qualifications requisite for the obtaining of
licenses to sell beer and wines, and regulating the sale of beer and wines
thereunder;

(s) specifying and
regulating the time and periods when, and the manner, methods and means by
which manufacturers shall deliver liquor within the state; and the time and
periods when, and the manner, methods and means by which liquor may lawfully be
conveyed or carried within the state;

(t) providing for the
making of returns by brewers of their sales of beer shipped within the state,
or from the state, showing the gross amount of such sales and providing for the
inspection of brewers' books and records, and for the checking of the accuracy
of any such returns;

(u) providing for the
making of returns by the wholesalers of beer whose breweries are located beyond
the boundaries of the state;

(v) providing for the
making of returns by any other liquor manufacturers, showing the gross amount
of liquor produced or purchased, the amount sold within and exported from the
state, and to whom so sold or exported, and providing for the inspection of the
premises of any such liquor manufacturers, their books and records, and for the
checking of any such return;

(w) providing for the
giving of fidelity bonds by any or all of the employees of the board:
PROVIDED, That the premiums therefor shall be paid by the board;

(x) providing for the
shipment by mail or common carrier of liquor to any person holding a permit and
residing in any unit which has, by election pursuant to this title, prohibited
the sale of liquor therein;

(y) prescribing methods
of manufacture, conditions of sanitation, standards of ingredients, quality and
identity of alcoholic beverages manufactured, sold, bottled, or handled by
licensees and the board; and conducting from time to time, in the interest of
the public health and general welfare, scientific studies and research relating
to alcoholic beverages and the use and effect thereof;

(z) seizing, confiscating
and destroying all alcoholic beverages manufactured, sold or offered for sale
within this state which do not conform in all respects to the standards
prescribed by this title or the regulations of the board: PROVIDED, Nothing
herein contained shall be construed as authorizing the liquor board to
prescribe, alter, limit or in any way change the present law as to the quantity
or percentage of alcohol used in the manufacturing of wine or other alcoholic
beverages.

Sec. 3. RCW 66.24.010 and 1998 c
126 s 2 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) Every license shall
be issued in the name of the applicant, and the holder thereof shall not allow
any other person to use the license.

(2) For the purpose of
considering any application for a license, the board may cause an inspection of
the premises to be made, and may inquire into all matters in connection with
the construction and operation of the premises. For the purpose of reviewing
any application for a license and for considering the denial, suspension or
revocation of any license, the liquor control board may consider any prior
criminal conduct of the applicant ((and)) including a criminal
history record information check. The board may submit the criminal history
record information check to the Washington state patrol and to the
identification division of the federal bureau of investigation in order that
these agencies may search their records for prior arrests and convictions of
the individual or individuals who filled out the forms. The board shall
require fingerprinting of any applicant whose criminal history record
information check is submitted to the federal bureau of investigation. The
provisions of RCW 9.95.240 and of chapter 9.96A RCW shall not apply to such
cases. The board may, in its discretion, grant or refuse the license applied
for. Authority to approve an uncontested or unopposed license may be granted
by the board to any staff member the board designates in writing. Conditions
for granting such authority shall be adopted by rule. No retail license of any
kind may be issued to:

(a) A person who has
not resided in the state for at least one month prior to making application,
except in cases of licenses issued to dining places on railroads, boats, or
aircraft;

(b) A copartnership,
unless all of the members thereof are qualified to obtain a license, as
provided in this section;

(c) A person whose
place of business is conducted by a manager or agent, unless such manager or
agent possesses the same qualifications required of the licensee;

(d) A corporation or a
limited liability company, unless it was created under the laws of the state of
Washington or holds a certificate of authority to transact business in the state
of Washington.

(3)(a) The board may,
in its discretion, subject to the provisions of RCW 66.08.150, suspend or
cancel any license; and all rights of the licensee to keep or sell liquor
thereunder shall be suspended or terminated, as the case may be.

(b) The board shall
immediately suspend the license or certificate of a person who has been
certified pursuant to RCW 74.20A.320 by the department of social and health
services as a person who is not in compliance with a support order. If the
person has continued to meet all other requirements for reinstatement during
the suspension, reissuance of the license or certificate shall be automatic
upon the board's receipt of a release issued by the department of social and
health services stating that the licensee is in compliance with the order.

(c) The board may
request the appointment of administrative law judges under chapter 34.12 RCW
who shall have power to administer oaths, issue subpoenas for the attendance of
witnesses and the production of papers, books, accounts, documents, and
testimony, examine witnesses, and to receive testimony in any inquiry,
investigation, hearing, or proceeding in any part of the state, under such
rules and regulations as the board may adopt.

(d) Witnesses shall be
allowed fees and mileage each way to and from any such inquiry, investigation,
hearing, or proceeding at the rate authorized by RCW 34.05.446, as now or
hereafter amended. Fees need not be paid in advance of appearance of witnesses
to testify or to produce books, records, or other legal evidence.

(e) In case of
disobedience of any person to comply with the order of the board or a subpoena
issued by the board, or any of its members, or administrative law judges, or on
the refusal of a witness to testify to any matter regarding which he or she may
be lawfully interrogated, the judge of the superior court of the county in
which the person resides, on application of any member of the board or
administrative law judge, shall compel obedience by contempt proceedings, as in
the case of disobedience of the requirements of a subpoena issued from said
court or a refusal to testify therein.

(4) Upon receipt of
notice of the suspension or cancellation of a license, the licensee shall
forthwith deliver up the license to the board. Where the license has been
suspended only, the board shall return the license to the licensee at the
expiration or termination of the period of suspension. The board shall notify
all vendors in the city or place where the licensee has its premises of the
suspension or cancellation of the license; and no employee may allow or cause
any liquor to be delivered to or for any person at the premises of that
licensee.

(5)(a) At the time of
the original issuance of a spirits, beer, and wine restaurant license, the
board shall prorate the license fee charged to the new licensee according to
the number of calendar quarters, or portion thereof, remaining until the first
renewal of that license is required.

(b) Unless sooner
canceled, every license issued by the board shall expire at midnight of the
thirtieth day of June of the fiscal year for which it was issued. However, if
the board deems it feasible and desirable to do so, it may establish, by rule
pursuant to chapter 34.05 RCW, a system for staggering the annual renewal dates
for any and all licenses authorized by this chapter. If such a system of
staggered annual renewal dates is established by the board, the license fees
provided by this chapter shall be appropriately prorated during the first year
that the system is in effect.

(6) Every license
issued under this section shall be subject to all conditions and restrictions
imposed by this title or by the regulations in force from time to time. All
conditions and restrictions imposed by the board in the issuance of an
individual license shall be listed on the face of the individual license along
with the trade name, address, and expiration date.

(7) Every licensee
shall post and keep posted its license, or licenses, in a conspicuous place on
the premises.

(8) Before the board
shall issue a license to an applicant it shall give notice of such application
to the chief executive officer of the incorporated city or town, if the
application be for a license within an incorporated city or town, or to the
county legislative authority, if the application be for a license outside the
boundaries of incorporated cities or towns; and such incorporated city or town,
through the official or employee selected by it, or the county legislative
authority or the official or employee selected by it, shall have the right to
file with the board within twenty days after date of transmittal of such
notice, written objections against the applicant or against the premises for
which the license is asked, and shall include with such objections a statement
of all facts upon which such objections are based, and in case written
objections are filed, may request and the liquor control board may in its
discretion hold a formal hearing subject to the applicable provisions of Title
34 RCW. Upon the granting of a license under this title the board shall send a
duplicate of the license or written notification to the chief executive officer
of the incorporated city or town in which the license is granted, or to the
county legislative authority if the license is granted outside the boundaries
of incorporated cities or towns.

(9) Before the board
issues any license to any applicant, it shall give (a) due consideration to the
location of the business to be conducted under such license with respect to the
proximity of churches, schools, and public institutions and (b) written notice
by certified mail of the application to churches, schools, and public
institutions within five hundred feet of the premises to be licensed. The
board shall issue no beer retailer license for either on-premises or
off-premises consumption or wine retailer license for either on-premises or
off-premises consumption or spirits, beer, and wine restaurant license covering
any premises not now licensed, if such premises are within five hundred feet of
the premises of any tax-supported public elementary or secondary school
measured along the most direct route over or across established public walks,
streets, or other public passageway from the outer property line of the school
grounds to the nearest public entrance of the premises proposed for license,
and if, after receipt by the school or public institution of the notice as
provided in this subsection, the board receives written notice, within twenty
days after posting such notice, from an official representative or
representatives of the school within five hundred feet of said proposed
licensed premises, indicating to the board that there is an objection to the
issuance of such license because of proximity to a school. For the purpose of
this section, church shall mean a building erected for and used exclusively for
religious worship and schooling or other activity in connection therewith. No
liquor license may be issued or reissued by the board to any motor sports
facility or licensee operating within the motor sports facility unless the
motor sports facility enforces a program reasonably calculated to prevent
alcohol or alcoholic beverages not purchased within the facility from entering
the facility and such program is approved by local law enforcement agencies.
It is the intent under this subsection that a retail license shall not be
issued by the board where doing so would, in the judgment of the board,
adversely affect a private school meeting the requirements for private schools
under Title 28A RCW, which school is within five hundred feet of the proposed
licensee. The board shall fully consider and give substantial weight to
objections filed by private schools. If a license is issued despite the
proximity of a private school, the board shall state in a letter addressed to
the private school the board's reasons for issuing the license.

(10) The restrictions
set forth in subsection (9) of this section shall not prohibit the board from
authorizing the assumption of existing licenses now located within the
restricted area by other persons or licenses or relocations of existing
licensed premises within the restricted area. In no case may the licensed
premises be moved closer to a church or school than it was before the
assumption or relocation.

(11) Nothing in this
section prohibits the board, in its discretion, from issuing a temporary retail
or distributor license to an applicant assuming an existing retail or
distributor license to continue the operation of the retail or distributor
premises during the period the application for the license is pending and when
the following conditions exist:

(a) The licensed
premises has been operated under a retail or distributor license within ninety
days of the date of filing the application for a temporary license;

(b) The retail or
distributor license for the premises has been surrendered pursuant to issuance
of a temporary operating license;

(c) The applicant for
the temporary license has filed with the board an application to assume the
retail or distributor license at such premises to himself or herself; and

(d) The application for
a temporary license is accompanied by a temporary license fee established by
the board by rule.

A temporary license
issued by the board under this section shall be for a period not to exceed
sixty days. A temporary license may be extended at the discretion of the board
for an additional sixty-day period upon payment of an additional fee and upon
compliance with all conditions required in this section.

Refusal by the board to
issue or extend a temporary license shall not entitle the applicant to request
a hearing. A temporary license may be canceled or suspended summarily at any
time if the board determines that good cause for cancellation or suspension
exists. RCW 66.08.130 and chapter 34.05 RCW shall apply to temporary licenses.

Application for a
temporary license shall be on such form as the board shall prescribe. If an
application for a temporary license is withdrawn before issuance or is refused
by the board, the fee which accompanied such application shall be refunded in
full.

Sec. 4. RCW 66.24.025 and 1995 c
232 s 2 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) If the board
approves, a license may be transferred, without charge, to the surviving spouse
only of a deceased licensee if the parties were maintaining a marital community
and the license was issued in the names of one or both of the parties. For
the purpose of considering the qualifications of the surviving party or parties
to receive a liquor license, the liquor control board may require a criminal
history record information check. The board may submit the criminal history
record information check to the Washington state patrol and to the
identification division of the federal bureau of investigation in order that
these agencies may search their records for prior arrests and convictions of
the individual or individuals who filled out the forms. The board shall
require fingerprinting of any applicant whose criminal history record
information check is submitted to the federal bureau of investigation.

(2) The
proposed sale of more than ten percent of the outstanding and/or issued stock
of a licensed corporation or any proposed change in the officers of a licensed
corporation must be reported to the board, and board approval must be obtained
before such changes are made. A fee of seventy-five dollars will be charged
for the processing of such change of stock ownership and/or corporate officers.

---
END ---