BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF
WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec.
1. It is the intent of the
legislature to provide the faculty and other employees of the state
universities, regional universities, The Evergreen State College, and the
community and technical colleges, membership in the higher education retirement
plans, that are defined contribution plans characterized by guaranteed
retirement contributions by the employer and fixed contributions by the employee.
Because the retirement benefit in a defined contribution plan is based on the
accumulations in and the performance of the investment funds to which the
employers and employees contribute, it is the intent of the legislature neither
to guarantee nor limit this benefit.

Sec. 2. RCW 28B.10.400 and 1979
ex.s. c 259 s 1 are each amended to read as follows:

The boards of regents
of the state universities, the boards of trustees of the regional universities
and of The Evergreen State College, and the state board for community ((college
education)) and technical colleges are authorized and empowered:

(1) To assist the
faculties and such other employees as any such board may designate in the
purchase of old age annuities or retirement income plans under such rules ((and
regulations)) as any such board may prescribe. County agricultural agents,
home demonstration agents, 4-H club agents, and assistant county agricultural
agents paid jointly by the Washington State University and the several counties
shall be deemed to be full time employees of the Washington State University
for the purposes hereof;

(2) To provide, under
such rules ((and regulations)) as any such board may prescribe for the
faculty members or other employees under its supervision, for the retirement of
any such faculty member or other employee on account of age or condition of
health, retirement on account of age to be not earlier than the sixty-fifth
birthday: PROVIDED, That such faculty member or such other employee may elect
to retire at the earliest age specified for retirement by federal social
security law: PROVIDED FURTHER, That any supplemental payment authorized by
subsection (3) of this section and paid as a result of retirement earlier than
age sixty-five shall be at an actuarially reduced rate;

(3) To pay to any such
retired person who established eligibility prior to July 1, 2002, or to
his or her designated beneficiary(s), each year after his or her
retirement, a supplemental amount which, when added to the amount of such
annuity or retirement income plan, or retirement income benefit pursuant to RCW
28B.10.415, received by ((him or his)) that person or that person's
designated beneficiary(s) in such year, will not exceed fifty percent of the
average annual salary paid to such retired person for his or her highest
two consecutive years of full time service under an annuity or retirement
income plan established pursuant to subsection (1) of this section at an
institution of higher education: PROVIDED, HOWEVER, That if such retired
person prior to his or her retirement elected a supplemental payment
survivors option, any such supplemental payments to such retired person or his or
her designated beneficiary(s) shall be at actuarially reduced rates:
PROVIDED FURTHER, That if a faculty member or other employee of an institution
of higher education who is a participant in a retirement plan authorized by
this section dies, or has died before retirement but after becoming eligible
for retirement on account of age, the designated beneficiary(s) shall be
entitled to receive the supplemental payment authorized by this subsection (3)
of this section to which such designated beneficiary(s) would have been
entitled had ((said)) the deceased faculty member or other employee
retired on the date of death after electing a supplemental payment survivors
option: PROVIDED FURTHER, That for the purpose of this subsection, the
designated beneficiary(s) shall be (a) the surviving spouse of the retiree; or,
(b) with the written consent of such spouse, if any, such other person or
persons as shall have an insurable interest in the retiree's life and shall
have been nominated by written designation duly executed and filed with the
retiree's institution of higher education.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
3. RCW 28B.10.423 (Annuities and retirement
income plans--Limit on retirement income--Adjustment of rates) and 1973 1st
ex.s. c 149 s 8 are each repealed.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 4. This act is necessary for
the immediate preservation of the public peace, health, or safety, or support
of the state government and its existing public institutions, and takes effect
July 1, 2002.

---
END ---