BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF
WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1. RCW 82.16.090 and 1988 c
228 s 1 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) The definitions
in this subsection apply to this section.

(a) "Cable
television business" means the business of providing cable service as
provided in the federal telecommunications act of 1996.

(b) "Light and
power business" and "gas distribution business" are defined as
provided in RCW 82.16.010.

(c) "Solid
waste collection business" is defined as provided in RCW 82.18.010.

(d) "Telephone
business" is defined as provided in RCW 82.04.065.

(2) Any customer
billing issued by a cable television business, light or power business
((or)), gas distribution business, solid waste collection
business, or telephone business, that serves a total of more than ((twenty))
five thousand customers and operates within the state, shall
include the following information:

(((1))) (a)
The rates and amounts of taxes paid directly by the customer upon products or
services rendered by the ((light and power business or gas distribution))
business; and

(((2))) (b)
The rate, origin, and ((approximate)) amount of each tax levied
upon the ((revenue of the light and power business or gas distribution
business and)) business that is added as a component of the amount
charged to the customer. Taxes ((based upon revenue of the light and power
business or gas distribution business)) to be listed on the customer
billing need not include taxes or fees levied by the federal government
or taxes or fees levied under chapter((s)) 54.28, 80.24, or 82.04
RCW.

(3) The first
customer billing issued after the beginning of each calendar year shall provide
an annual summary of taxes directly paid by the customer and the amount of tax
added as a component of the amount charged the customer during the previous
year.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 2. RCW 82.16.090 is
recodified as a section in chapter 82.32A RCW.

---
END ---