BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF
WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec.
1. It is the intent of the
legislature to ensure full funding for the state's obligation under Initiative
Measure No. 732, as codified under RCW 28A.400.205, 28A.400.206, 28B.50.465,
and 28B.50.468. To this end, the legislature intends to require prefunding of
the costs of the initiative. By requiring the initiative to be funded through
an advance deposit in the emergency reserve fund, the legislature will assure
both that moneys to fund the initiative will be available in advance of the
need for them, and that the funds will be protected against expenditure for any
other purpose.

Sec. 2. RCW 43.135.045 and 2001
c 3 s 9 (Initiative Measure No. 728), 2000 2nd sp.s. c 5 s 1, and 2000 2nd
sp.s. c 2 s 3 are each reenacted and amended to read as follows:

(1) The emergency
reserve fund is established in the state treasury. During each fiscal year,
the state treasurer shall deposit in the emergency reserve fund all general
fund‑-state revenues in excess of the state expenditure limit for that
fiscal year. Deposits shall be made at the end of each fiscal quarter based on
projections of state revenues and the state expenditure limit. The treasurer
shall make transfers between these accounts as necessary to reconcile actual
annual revenues and the expenditure limit for fiscal year 2000 and thereafter.

(2) By June 30,
2003, and by June 30th of the second year of each fiscal biennium thereafter,
the legislature shall deposit in the emergency reserve fund an amount estimated
by the office of financial management, in consultation with the fiscal
committees of the legislature, to be sufficient to fund, during the succeeding
fiscal biennium, the annual salary adjustments for school district and
community and technical college employees as required in RCW 28A.400.205,
28B.50.465, and 28B.50.468. Amounts deposited in the emergency reserve fund
under this subsection shall be expended solely for the purpose of providing
annual salary adjustments under RCW 28A.400.205, 28B.50.465, and 28B.50.468.

(3) Except for
moneys deposited pursuant to subsection (2) of this section, the
legislature may appropriate moneys from the emergency reserve fund only with
approval of at least two-thirds of the members of each house of the
legislature, and then only if the appropriation does not cause total
expenditures to exceed the state expenditure limit under this chapter.

(((3))) (4)
The emergency reserve fund balance shall not exceed five percent of annual
general fund‑-state revenues as projected by the official state revenue
forecast, exclusive of amounts deposited under subsection (2) of this
section. Any balance in excess of five percent, exclusive of amounts
deposited under subsection (2) of this section, shall be transferred on a
quarterly basis by the state treasurer as follows: Seventy-five percent to the
student achievement fund hereby created in the state treasury and twenty-five
percent to the general fund balance. The treasurer shall make transfers
between these accounts as necessary to reconcile actual annual revenues for
fiscal year 2000 and thereafter. When per-student state funding for the
maintenance and operation of K-12 education meets a level of no less than
ninety percent of the national average of total funding from all sources per
student as determined by the most recent published data from the national
center for education statistics of the United States department of education, as
calculated by the office of financial management, further deposits to the
student achievement fund shall be required only to the extent necessary to
maintain the ninety-percent level. Remaining funds are part of the general
fund balance and these funds are subject to the expenditure limits of this
chapter.

(((4))) (5)
The education construction fund is hereby created in the state treasury.

(a) Funds may be
appropriated from the education construction fund exclusively for common school
construction or higher education construction.

(b) Funds may be
appropriated for any other purpose only if approved by a two-thirds vote of
each house of the legislature and if approved by a vote of the people at the
next general election. An appropriation approved by the people under this
subsection shall result in an adjustment to the state expenditure limit only
for the fiscal period for which the appropriation is made and shall not affect
any subsequent fiscal period.

(((5))) (6)
Funds from the student achievement fund shall be appropriated to the
superintendent of public instruction strictly for distribution to school
districts to meet the provisions set out in the student achievement act.
Allocations shall be made on an equal per full-time equivalent student basis to
each school district.

(((6))) (7)
Earnings of the emergency reserve fund under RCW 43.84.092(4)(a) shall be
transferred quarterly to the multimodal transportation account, except for
those earnings that are in excess of thirty-five million dollars each fiscal
year. Within thirty days following any fiscal year in which earnings
transferred to the multimodal transportation account under this subsection did
not total thirty-five million dollars, the state treasurer shall transfer from
the emergency reserve fund an amount necessary to bring the total deposited in
the multimodal transportation account under this subsection to thirty-five
million dollars. The revenues to the multimodal transportation account
reflected in this subsection provide ongoing support for the transportation
programs of the state. However, it is the intent of the legislature that any
new long-term financial support that may be subsequently provided for
transportation programs will be used to replace and supplant the revenues
reflected in this subsection, thereby allowing those revenues to be returned to
the purposes to which they were previously dedicated.

Sec. 3. RCW 28A.400.205 and 2001
c 4 s 2 (Initiative Measure No. 732) are each amended to read as follows:

(1) School district
employees shall be provided an annual salary cost-of-living increase in
accordance with this section.

(a) The cost-of-living
increase shall be calculated by applying the rate of the yearly increase in the
cost-of-living index to any state-funded salary base used in state funding
formulas for teachers and other school district employees. Beginning with the
2001-02 school year, and for each subsequent school year, each school district
shall be provided a cost-of-living allocation sufficient to grant this
cost-of-living increase for the salaries, including mandatory salary-related
benefits, of all employees of the district.

(b) A school district
shall distribute its cost-of-living allocation for salaries and salary-related
benefits in accordance with the district's salary schedules, collective
bargaining agreements, and compensation policies. No later than the end of the
school year, each school district shall certify to the superintendent of public
instruction that it has spent funds provided for cost-of-living increases on
salaries and salary-related benefits.

(c) Any funded
cost-of-living increase shall be included in the salary base used to determine
cost-of-living increases for all school employees in subsequent years. For
teachers and other certificated instructional staff, the rate of the annual
cost-of-living increase funded for certificated instructional staff shall be
applied to the base salary used with the statewide salary allocation schedule
established under RCW 28A.150.410 and to any other salary models used to
recognize school district personnel costs.

(d) Beginning with the
2001-02 school year, the state shall fully fund the cost-of-living increase in
this section as part of its obligation to meet the basic education requirements
under Article IX of the Washington Constitution. During each regular
session in an odd-numbered year, the legislature shall appropriate from the
emergency reserve fund, solely for the purposes of and in accordance with this
section, money deposited in the emergency reserve fund under RCW 43.135.045(2)
and any other money necessary to carry out the intent of this section.

(2) For
the purposes of this section, "cost-of-living index" means, for any
school year, the previous calendar year's annual average consumer price index,
using the official current base, compiled by the bureau of labor statistics,
United States department of labor for the state of Washington. If the bureau
of labor statistics develops more than one consumer price index for areas
within the state, the index covering the greatest number of people, covering
areas exclusively within the boundaries of the state, and including all items
shall be used for the cost-of-living index in this section.

---
END ---