BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF
WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec.
1. (1) The legislature finds
that passage of the energy policy act (P.L. 102-486) by congress in 1992 has
had a profound impact on the electricity industry in the northwest. The
electricity market in the state has transformed from transactions between
utilities and seasonal exchanges among utilities in the northwest and the
southwest to an active wholesale electricity market that involves independent
marketers and developers of merchant power plants. Uncertainty about changes
occurring in the market and the industry has discouraged investment in
additional generation and transmission capacity and conservation. Recent
experience with extreme price fluctuations in the wholesale markets continues
to have a significant impact on the electric industry.

(2) The legislature
declares that state energy strategy should be revised to consider the
implications of wholesale market volatility upon the electric industry. To the
extent that actions can be undertaken to encourage investment in additional
generation resources, new technologies, and conservation, they should be
pursued to minimize the impacts of wholesale market volatility on consumers,
utilities, and independent power producers.

Sec. 2. RCW 43.21F.015 and 1994
c 207 s 3 are each amended to read as follows:

It is the policy of the
state of Washington that:

(1) The development and
use of a diverse array of energy resources with emphasis on conservation,
renewable energy resources, and new generation and energy management
technologies shall be encouraged;

(2) The supply of
energy shall be sufficient to insure the health and economic welfare of its
citizens that includes meeting projected demand for Washington as well as
other states or foreign countries having an impact on this state's energy
supply;

(3) The development and
use of energy resources shall be consistent with the statutory environmental
policies of the state;

(4) Energy conservation
and elimination of wasteful and uneconomic uses of energy and materials shall
be encouraged, and this conservation should include, but is not limited to, cost-effective
energy efficiency, resource recovery that achieves at least a doubling
of previous resource utilization or eighty percent efficiency, and
materials recycling;

(5) In energy emergency
shortage situations, energy requirements to maintain ((the)) critical
public health, safety, and welfare activities shall be given priority in
the allocation of energy resources while curtailing noncritical government
functions, and citizens and industry shall be assisted in adjusting to the
limited availability of energy in order to minimize adverse impacts on their
physical, social, and economic well being;

(6) State government
shall provide a source of impartial and objective information in order that
this energy policy may be enhanced; and

(7) The state energy
strategy shall provide primary guidance for implementation of the state's
energy policy.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
3. (1) A joint task force on
long-term energy supply is established. The joint task force will consist of
eleven members, as follows:

(a) Two members from
each of the two largest caucuses of the senate, appointed by the president of
the senate. At least one member from each caucus will be a member of the
standing committee that hears energy issues. The standing committee members
will be the chair of the committee and the ranking minority member of the
committee;

(b) Two members from
each of the two largest caucuses of the house of representatives, appointed by
the speaker of the house of representatives. At least one member from each
caucus will be a member of the standing committee that hears energy issues.
The standing committee members will be the chair of the committee and the
ranking minority member of the committee;

(c) Three members from
the executive branch appointed by the governor to include the governor's office
and the department of community, trade, and economic development or its
successor agency.

(2) The task force will
choose its chair from among its membership.

(3) The task force,
where feasible, may consult with individuals from the public and private sector
and may ask such persons to establish advisory committees or work groups.
Those with whom the task force may consult include representatives from at
least the following:

(a) Retail and
wholesale energy providers;

(b) Environmental
organizations;

(c) Energy users
including commercial, industrial, and residential users;

(d) Labor organizations
involved directly and indirectly with the energy industry;

(e) Cities;

(f) Counties;

(g) Regional
organizations involved in energy planning and distribution; and

(h) State agencies that
deal with energy issues.

(4) The task force will
study, as part of its review of the state's energy strategy under RCW
43.21F.090, issues relating to long-term energy supply and demand and:

(a) Identify methods to
ensure the creation of new capacity in the electrical supply system in advance
of the critical need for energy;

(b) Identify obstacles
that provide a disincentive to building new generation;

(c) Identify incentives
for investment in building new generation capacity, including setting a floor
price for electricity to offset costs of construction; and

(d) Identify methods to
encourage demand management options and technologies.

(5) In its review of
the state's energy strategy, the task force will recommend revisions and
specific actions that may be taken to implement the state's energy strategy.
The task force will examine a broad array of energy resources and environmental
impacts of supply and demand side options.

(6) The task force will
use staff from senate committee services and the house of representatives
office of program research and staff from the governor's office and the
department of community, trade, and economic development, but may hire
additional staff with specific technical expertise if such expertise is
necessary to carry out the mandates of this study.

(7) The task force will
report its findings and recommendations to the legislature by December 31,
2002.

(8) This
section expires July 1, 2003.

Sec. 4. RCW 43.21F.090 and 1996
c 186 s 106 are each amended to read as follows:

The ((department))
joint task force on long-term energy supply established in section 3 of this
act shall review the state energy strategy as developed under section 1,
chapter 201, Laws of 1991((, periodically with the guidance of an advisory
committee)). The state energy strategy may be reviewed periodically.
For each review, ((an advisory committee)) a task force shall be
established with a membership resembling as closely as possible the ((original
energy strategy advisory committee specified under section 1, chapter 201, Laws
of 1991)) joint task force on long-term energy supply. ((Upon
completion of a public hearing regarding the advisory committee's advice and
recommendations for revisions to the energy strategy)) Except as
provided in section 3 of this act, a written report shall be conveyed by
the ((department)) task force to the governor and the appropriate
legislative committees by July 1st of the year following the year in which
the task force is established. Any ((advisory committee)) task
force established under this section shall be dissolved within three months
after their written report is conveyed.

---
END ---