BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF
WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1. RCW 19.27.097 and 1995 c
399 s 9 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) Each applicant for
a building permit of a building necessitating potable water shall provide
evidence of an adequate water supply for the intended use of the building. Evidence
may be in the form of a water right permit from the department of ecology, a
letter from an approved water purveyor stating the ability to provide water, or
another form sufficient to verify the existence of an adequate water supply.
In addition to other authorities, the county or city may impose conditions on
building permits requiring connection to an existing public water system where
the existing system is willing and able to provide safe and reliable potable
water to the applicant with reasonable economy and efficiency. The county
or city shall require connection to a public water system operated by a water
district, public utility district, or other special purpose district providing
potable water service if the building will be located within the service area
of the district and the district has requested the county or city to impose
that condition on the permit. An application for a water right shall not
be sufficient proof of an adequate water supply.

(2) Within counties not
required or not choosing to plan pursuant to RCW 36.70A.040, the county and the
state may mutually determine those areas in the county in which the
requirements of subsection (1) of this section shall not apply. The
departments of health and ecology shall coordinate on the implementation of
this section. Should the county and the state fail to mutually determine those
areas to be designated pursuant to this subsection, the county may petition the
department of community, trade, and economic development to mediate or, if
necessary, make the determination.

(3)
Buildings that do not need potable water facilities are exempt from the
provisions of this section. The department of ecology, after consultation with
local governments, may adopt rules to implement this section, which may
recognize differences between high-growth and low-growth counties.

--- END ---