BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF
WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1. RCW 43.62.035 and 1997 c
429 s 26 are each amended to read as follows:

The office of financial
management shall determine the population of each county of the state annually
as of April 1st of each year and on or before July 1st of each year shall file a
certificate with the secretary of state showing its determination of the
population for each county. The office of financial management also shall
determine the percentage increase in population for each county over the
preceding ten-year period, as of April 1st, and shall file a certificate with
the secretary of state by July 1st showing its determination. At least once
every five years or upon the availability of decennial census data, whichever
is later, the office of financial management shall prepare twenty-year growth
management planning population projections required by RCW 36.70A.110 for each
county that adopts a comprehensive plan under RCW 36.70A.040 and shall review
these projections with such counties and the cities in those counties before final
adoption. The population projections must be accompanied by a statement
from the director of financial management, in consultation with appropriate
state agencies and officials, stating that adequate water supplies exist or
will be available to serve the projected population. The county and its
cities may provide to the office such information as they deem relevant to the
office's projection, and the office shall consider and comment on such
information before adoption. Each projection shall be expressed as a
reasonable range developed within the standard state high and low projection.
The middle range shall represent the office's estimate of the most likely
population projection for the county. If any city or county believes that a
projection will not accurately reflect actual population growth in a county, it
may petition the office to revise the projection accordingly. The office shall
complete the first set of ranges for every county by December 31, 1995.

A
comprehensive plan adopted or amended before December 31, 1995, shall not be
considered to be in noncompliance with the twenty-year growth management
planning population projection if the projection used in the comprehensive plan
is in compliance with the range later adopted under this section.

--- END ---