BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF
WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec.
1. A new section is added
to chapter 43.88 RCW to read as follows:

(1) The office of
financial management must include in its capital budget instructions, beginning
with its instructions for the 2003-05 capital budget, a request for
"yes" or "no" answers for the following additional
informational questions from capital budget applicants for all proposed major
capital construction projects valued over five million dollars and required to
complete a predesign:

(a) For proposed
capital projects identified in this subsection that are located in or serving
city or county planning under RCW 36.70A.040:

(i) Whether the
proposed capital project is identified in the host city or county comprehensive
plan, including the capital facility plan, and implementing rules adopted under
chapter 36.70A RCW;

(ii) Whether the
proposed capital project is located within an adopted urban growth area:

(A) If at all located
within an adopted urban growth area boundary, whether a project facilitates,
accommodates, or attracts planned population and employment growth;

(B) If at all located
outside an urban growth area boundary, whether the proposed capital project may
create pressures for additional development;

(b) For proposed
capital projects identified in this subsection that are requesting state
funding:

(i) Whether there was
regional coordination during project development;

(ii) Whether local and
additional funds were leveraged;

(iii) Whether
environmental outcomes and the reduction of adverse environmental impacts were
examined.

(2) For projects
subject to subsection (1) of this section, the office of financial management
shall request the required information be provided during the predesign process
of major capital construction projects to reduce long-term costs and increase
process efficiency.

(3) The office of
financial management, in fulfilling its duties under RCW 43.88.030(3) to create
a capital budget document, must take into account information gathered under
subsections (1) and (2) of this section in an effort to promote state capital
facility expenditures that minimize unplanned or uncoordinated infrastructure
and development costs, support economic and quality of life benefits for
existing communities, and support local government planning efforts.

(4) The office of
community development must provide staff support to the office of financial
management and affected capital budget applicants to help collect data required
by subsections (1) and (2) of this section.

Sec. 2. RCW 43.88.030 and 2000
2nd sp.s. c 4 s 12 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) The director of
financial management shall provide all agencies with a complete set of
instructions for submitting biennial budget requests to the director at least
three months before agency budget documents are due into the office of
financial management. The director shall provide agencies and committees that
are required under RCW 44.40.070 to develop comprehensive six-year program and
financial plans with a complete set of instructions for submitting these
program and financial plans at the same time that instructions for submitting
other budget requests are provided. The budget document or documents shall
consist of the governor's budget message which shall be explanatory of the
budget and shall contain an outline of the proposed financial policies of the
state for the ensuing fiscal period, as well as an outline of the proposed
six-year financial policies where applicable, and shall describe in connection
therewith the important features of the budget. The message shall set forth
the reasons for salient changes from the previous fiscal period in expenditure
and revenue items and shall explain any major changes in financial policy.
Attached to the budget message shall be such supporting schedules, exhibits and
other explanatory material in respect to both current operations and capital
improvements as the governor shall deem to be useful to the legislature. The
budget document or documents shall set forth a proposal for expenditures in the
ensuing fiscal period, or six-year period where applicable, based upon the
estimated revenues and caseloads as approved by the economic and revenue
forecast council and caseload forecast council or upon the estimated revenues
and caseloads of the office of financial management for those funds, accounts,
sources, and programs for which the forecast councils do not prepare an
official forecast, including those revenues anticipated to support the six-year
programs and financial plans under RCW 44.40.070. In estimating revenues to
support financial plans under RCW 44.40.070, the office of financial management
shall rely on information and advice from the transportation revenue forecast
council. Revenues shall be estimated for such fiscal period from the source
and at the rates existing by law at the time of submission of the budget
document, including the supplemental budgets submitted in the even-numbered
years of a biennium. However, the estimated revenues and caseloads for use in
the governor's budget document may be adjusted to reflect budgetary revenue
transfers and revenue and caseload estimates dependent upon budgetary
assumptions of enrollments, workloads, and caseloads. All adjustments to the
approved estimated revenues and caseloads must be set forth in the budget
document. The governor may additionally submit, as an appendix to each
supplemental, biennial, or six-year agency budget or to the budget document or
documents, a proposal for expenditures in the ensuing fiscal period from
revenue sources derived from proposed changes in existing statutes.

Supplemental and
biennial documents shall reflect a six-year expenditure plan consistent with
estimated revenues from existing sources and at existing rates for those
agencies required to submit six-year program and financial plans under RCW
44.40.070. Any additional revenue resulting from proposed changes to existing
statutes shall be separately identified within the document as well as related
expenditures for the six-year period.

The budget document or
documents shall also contain:

(a) Revenues classified
by fund and source for the immediately past fiscal period, those received or
anticipated for the current fiscal period, those anticipated for the ensuing
biennium, and those anticipated for the ensuing six-year period to support the
six-year programs and financial plans required under RCW 44.40.070;

(b) The undesignated
fund balance or deficit, by fund;

(c) Such additional
information dealing with expenditures, revenues, workload, performance, and
personnel as the legislature may direct by law or concurrent resolution;

(d) Such additional
information dealing with revenues and expenditures as the governor shall deem
pertinent and useful to the legislature;

(e) Tabulations showing
expenditures classified by fund, function, activity, and agency;

(f) A delineation of
each agency's activities, including those activities funded from nonbudgeted,
nonappropriated sources, including funds maintained outside the state treasury;

(g) Identification of
all proposed direct expenditures to implement the Puget Sound water quality
plan under chapter 90.71 RCW, shown by agency and in total; and

(h) Tabulations showing
each postretirement adjustment by retirement system established after fiscal
year 1991, to include, but not be limited to, estimated total payments made to
the end of the previous biennial period, estimated payments for the present
biennium, and estimated payments for the ensuing biennium.

(2) The budget document
or documents shall include detailed estimates of all anticipated revenues
applicable to proposed operating or capital expenditures and shall also include
all proposed operating or capital expenditures. The total of beginning
undesignated fund balance and estimated revenues less working capital and other
reserves shall equal or exceed the total of proposed applicable expenditures.
The budget document or documents shall further include:

(a) Interest,
amortization and redemption charges on the state debt;

(b) Payments of all
reliefs, judgments, and claims;

(c) Other statutory
expenditures;

(d) Expenditures
incident to the operation for each agency;

(e) Revenues derived
from agency operations;

(f) Expenditures and
revenues shall be given in comparative form showing those incurred or received
for the immediately past fiscal period and those anticipated for the current
biennium and next ensuing biennium, as well as those required to support the
six-year programs and financial plans required under RCW 44.40.070;

(g) A showing and
explanation of amounts of general fund and other funds obligations for debt
service and any transfers of moneys that otherwise would have been available
for appropriation;

(h) Common school
expenditures on a fiscal-year basis;

(i) A showing, by
agency, of the value and purpose of financing contracts for the lease/purchase
or acquisition of personal or real property for the current and ensuing fiscal
periods; and

(j) A showing and
explanation of anticipated amounts of general fund and other funds required to
amortize the unfunded actuarial accrued liability of the retirement system
specified under chapter 41.45 RCW, and the contributions to meet such
amortization, stated in total dollars and as a level percentage of total
compensation.

(3) A separate capital
budget document or schedule shall be submitted that will contain the following:

(a) A statement setting
forth a long-range facilities plan for the state that identifies and includes
the highest priority needs within affordable spending levels;

(b) A capital program
consisting of proposed capital projects for the next biennium and the two
biennia succeeding the next biennium consistent with the long-range facilities
plan. Insomuch as is practical, and recognizing emergent needs, the capital
program shall reflect the priorities, projects, and spending levels proposed in
previously submitted capital budget documents in order to provide a reliable
long-range planning tool for the legislature and state agencies;

(c) A capital plan
consisting of proposed capital spending for at least four biennia succeeding
the next biennium;

(d) A strategic plan
for reducing backlogs of maintenance and repair projects. The plan shall
include a prioritized list of specific facility deficiencies and capital
projects to address the deficiencies for each agency, cost estimates for each
project, a schedule for completing projects over a reasonable period of time,
and identification of normal maintenance activities to reduce future backlogs;

(e) A statement of the
reason or purpose for a project;

(f) Verification that a
project is consistent with the provisions set forth in chapter 36.70A RCW;

(g) A statement about
the proposed site, size, and estimated life of the project, if applicable;

(h) Estimated total
project cost, including the cost of the raw land, any in lieu of real
property taxes, and the cost of development;

(i) For major projects
valued over five million dollars, estimated costs for the following project
components: Acquisition, consultant services, construction, equipment, project
management, and other costs included as part of the project. Project component
costs shall be displayed in a standard format defined by the office of
financial management to allow comparisons between projects;

(j) Estimated total
project cost for each phase of the project as defined by the office of
financial management;

(k) Estimated ensuing
biennium costs;

(l) Estimated costs
beyond the ensuing biennium;

(m) Estimated
construction start and completion dates;

(n) Source and type of
funds proposed;

(o) Estimated ongoing
operating budget costs or savings resulting from the project, including
staffing and maintenance costs;

(p) For any capital
appropriation requested for a state agency for the acquisition of land or the
capital improvement of land in which the primary purpose of the acquisition or
improvement is recreation or wildlife habitat conservation, the capital budget
document, or an omnibus list of recreation and habitat acquisitions provided
with the governor's budget document, shall identify the projected costs of
operation and maintenance for at least the two biennia succeeding the next
biennium. Omnibus lists of habitat and recreation land acquisitions shall
include individual project cost estimates for operation and maintenance as well
as a total for all state projects included in the list. The document shall identify
the source of funds from which the operation and maintenance costs are proposed
to be funded;

(q) Such other
information bearing upon capital projects as the governor deems to be useful;

(r) Standard terms,
including a standard and uniform definition of normal maintenance, for all
capital projects;

(s) Such other
information as the legislature may direct by law or concurrent resolution.

For purposes of this
subsection (3), the term "capital project" shall be defined
subsequent to the analysis, findings, and recommendations of a joint committee
comprised of representatives from the house capital appropriations committee,
senate ways and means committee, legislative transportation committee,
legislative evaluation and accountability program committee, and office of
financial management.

(4) No change affecting
the comparability of agency or program information relating to expenditures,
revenues, workload, performance and personnel shall be made in the format of
any budget document or report presented to the legislature under this section
or RCW 43.88.160(1) relative to the format of the budget document or report
which was presented to the previous regular session of the legislature during
an odd-numbered year without prior legislative concurrence. Prior legislative
concurrence shall consist of (a) a favorable majority vote on the proposal by
the standing committees on ways and means of both houses if the legislature is
in session or (b) a favorable majority vote on the proposal by members of the
legislative evaluation and accountability program committee if the legislature
is not in session.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
3. A new section is added
to chapter 43.88A RCW to read as follows:

Except for
transportation projects, trust lands, or purchase or exchange of land by
institutions of higher education under RCW 28B.10.016, the legislature must
have a fiscal note prepared for any purchase or exchange of land authorized in
a capital budget or by separate appropriation. The appropriate legislative
fiscal committees must request a fiscal note containing the following:

(1) Cost of raw land;

(2) Cost of ongoing
maintenance;

(3) Cost of ongoing
operations and source of funding;

(4) Employee costs on a
full-time equivalent basis including administrative costs;

(5) Cost of
development;

(6) Any other known
costs; and

(7) Any in
lieu of real property taxes, including amounts due junior taxing districts.

---
END ---