BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF
WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec.
1. A new section is added
to chapter 84.52 RCW to read as follows:

Each
county assessor, before March 1st each year, shall prepare and submit to the
department of revenue a detailed report on property taxes levied within the
county. The report must include assessed valuation, levy rate, and levy amount
for each type of levy by each taxing district authorized to levy property taxes
within the county. The report must also include information necessary to
calculate the property tax limit contained in chapter 84.55 RCW for each taxing
district, including the regular property tax lawfully levied in the three most
recent years; the amount of new construction, improvements to property, and
increase in assessed value of state-assessed property; the tax rate for the
preceding year; the levy amount requested by the taxing district; copies of
ordinances adopted under RCW 84.55.0101 and 84.55.120; copies of ballot
propositions authorizing increases in the limit under RCW 84.55.050; the amount
of levy capacity available under RCW 84.55.092; and other information the
department of revenue may request.

--- END ---