BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF
WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1. RCW 84.55.050 and 1989 c
287 s 1 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) Subject to any
otherwise applicable statutory dollar rate limitations, regular property taxes
may be levied by or for a taxing district in an amount exceeding the
limitations provided for in this chapter if such levy is authorized by a
proposition approved by a majority of the voters of the taxing district voting
on the proposition at a general election held within the district or at a
special election within the taxing district called by the district for the
purpose of submitting such proposition to the voters. Any election held
pursuant to this section shall be held not more than twelve months prior to the
date on which the proposed levy is to be made. The ballot of the proposition
shall state the dollar rate or rates proposed and shall clearly state
any conditions which are applicable under subsection (3) of this section.

(2) After a levy
authorized pursuant to this section is made, the dollar amount of such levy
shall be used for the purpose of computing the limitations for subsequent
levies provided for in this chapter, except as provided in subsection (4) of
this section.

(3) A proposition
placed before the voters under this section may:

(a) Limit the period
for which the increased levy is to be made;

(b) Limit the purpose
for which the increased levy is to be made, but if the limited purpose includes
making redemption payments on bonds, the period for which the increased levies
are made shall not exceed nine years;

(c) Set the levy at a
rate less than the maximum rate allowed for the district; ((or))

(d) Set the rates
for the first two levies imposed after the proposition is approved; or

(e) Include any
combination of the conditions in this subsection.

(4) After the expiration
of a limited period or the satisfaction of a limited purpose, whichever comes
first, subsequent levies shall be computed as if:

(a) The limited
proposition under subsection (3) of this section had not been approved; and

(b) The
taxing district had made levies at the maximum rates which would otherwise have
been allowed under this chapter during the years levies were made under the
limited proposition.

--- END ---