BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF
WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1. RCW 46.12.101 and 1998 c
203 s 11 are each amended to read as follows:

A transfer of ownership
in a motor vehicle is perfected by compliance with the requirements of this
section.

(1) If an owner
transfers his or her interest in a vehicle, other than by the creation,
deletion, or change of a security interest, the owner shall, at the time of the
delivery of the vehicle, execute an assignment to the transferee and provide an
odometer disclosure statement under RCW 46.12.124 on the certificate of ownership
or as the department otherwise prescribes, and cause the certificate and
assignment to be transmitted to the transferee. The owner shall notify the
department or its agents or subagents, in writing, on the appropriate form, of
the date of the sale or transfer, the name and address of the owner and of the
transferee, the transferee's driver's license number if available, and such
description of the vehicle, including the vehicle identification number, the
license plate number, or both, as may be required in the appropriate form
provided or approved for that purpose by the department. The report of sale
will be deemed properly filed if all information required in this section is
provided on the form and includes a department-authorized notation that the document
was received by the department, its agents, or subagents on or before the ((fifth))
tenth day after the sale of the vehicle, excluding Saturdays, Sundays,
and state and federal holidays. A report of sale that has been properly
addressed and deposited postpaid in the United States mail is deemed to have
been received by the department on the date of the mailing. It is presumed
that the date shown by the post office cancellation mark on the envelope is the
date of mailing. A person who causes a cancellation mark to reflect a date
earlier than the actual date of mailing is guilty of a misdemeanor punishable
under RCW 9.92.030. Agents and subagents shall immediately electronically
transmit the seller's report of sale to the department. Reports of sale
processed and recorded by the department's agents or subagents may be subject
to fees as specified in RCW 46.01.140 (4)(a) or (5)(b).

(2) The requirements of
subsection (1) of this section to provide an odometer disclosure statement
apply to the transfer of vehicles held for lease when transferred to a lessee
and then to the lessor at the end of the leasehold and to vehicles held in a
fleet when transferred to a purchaser.

(3) Except as provided
in RCW 46.70.122, the transferee shall within fifteen days after
delivery to the transferee of the vehicle((,)) execute the application
for a new certificate of ownership in the same space provided therefor on the
certificate or as the department prescribes, ((and)) cause the
certificates and application to be transmitted to the department, and notify
the seller in writing that the transferee has transmitted the certificates and
application to the department.

(4) Upon request of the
owner or transferee, a secured party in possession of the certificate of
ownership shall, unless the transfer was a breach of its security agreement,
either deliver the certificate to the transferee for transmission to the
department or, when the secured party receives the owner's assignment from the
transferee, it shall transmit the transferee's application for a new
certificate, the existing certificate, and the required fee to the department.
Compliance with this section does not affect the rights of the secured party.

(5) If a security
interest is reserved or created at the time of the transfer, the certificate of
ownership shall be retained by or delivered to the person who becomes the
secured party, and the parties shall comply with the provisions of RCW
46.12.170.

(6) If the purchaser or
transferee fails or neglects to make application to transfer the certificate of
ownership and license registration within fifteen days after the date of
delivery of the vehicle, he or she shall on making application for transfer be
assessed a twenty-five dollar penalty on the sixteenth day and two dollars
additional for each day thereafter, but not to exceed one hundred dollars. The
director may by rule establish conditions under which the penalty will not be
assessed when an application for transfer is delayed for reasons beyond the
control of the purchaser. Conditions for not assessing the penalty may be
established for but not limited to delays caused by:

(a) The department
requesting additional supporting documents;

(b) Extended
hospitalization or illness of the purchaser;

(c) Failure of a legal
owner to release his or her interest;

(d) Failure,
negligence, or nonperformance of the department, auditor, or subagent.

Failure or neglect to
make application to transfer the certificate of ownership and license
registration within forty-five days after the date of delivery of the vehicle
is a misdemeanor.

(7) Upon receipt of an
application for reissue or replacement of a certificate of ownership and
transfer of license registration, accompanied by the endorsed certificate of
ownership or other documentary evidence as is deemed necessary, the department
shall, if the application is in order and if all provisions relating to the
certificate of ownership and license registration have been complied with,
issue new certificates of title and license registration as in the case of an
original issue and shall transmit the fees together with an itemized detailed
report to the state treasurer, to be deposited in the motor vehicle fund.

(8) Once each quarter
the department shall report to the department of revenue a list of those
vehicles for which a seller's report has been received but no transfer of title
has taken place.

Sec. 2. RCW 46.55.110 and 1999 c
398 s 6 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) When an
unauthorized vehicle is impounded, the impounding towing operator shall notify
the legal and registered owners of the impoundment of the unauthorized vehicle
and the owners of any other items of personal property registered or titled
with the department. The ((notification shall)) notice must be
sent by first-class mail within twenty-four hours after the impoundment to the
last known registered and legal owners of the vehicle, and the owners of any
other items of personal property registered or titled with the department, as
provided by the law enforcement agency, and shall inform the owners of the
identity of the person or agency authorizing the impound. The ((notification
shall)) notice must also include the name of the impounding tow
firm, its address, and telephone number. The notice shall also include the
location, time of the impound, and by whose authority the vehicle was
impounded. The notice shall also include the written ((notice)) notification
of the right of redemption and opportunity for a hearing to contest the
validity of the impoundment pursuant to RCW 46.55.120.

(2) ((In addition,))
If a suspended license impound has been ordered, ((the notice must
state)) the impounding towing operator shall notify the legal and
registered owners of the suspended license impound of the vehicle and the
owners of any other items of personal property registered or titled with the
department. The notice must be sent by first-class mail within twenty-four
hours after the impoundment to the last known registered and legal owners of
the vehicle, and the owners of any other items of personal property registered
or titled with the department, as provided by the law enforcement agency. The
notice must include the following items:

(a) The identity of
the person or agency authorizing the impound;

(b) The name of the
impounding tow firm, its address, and telephone number;

(c) The location,
time of the impound, and the length of the impound((,));

(d) Notification of
the right of redemption and opportunity for a hearing to contest the validity
of the impoundment under RCW 46.55.120;

(e) Notification of
the right to submit a written request for release of the vehicle on the basis
of economic or personal hardship under RCW 46.55.120(5);

(f) Notification of
the requirement of the posting of a security deposit to ensure payment of the
costs of removal, towing, and storage((,));

(g) Notification
that if the security deposit is not posted the vehicle will immediately be
processed and sold at auction as an abandoned vehicle, and the requirements
set out in RCW 46.55.130 regarding the sale of abandoned vehicles at auction;

(h) The
requirements set out in RCW 46.55.120(1)(((b))) (e) regarding the
payment of the costs of removal, towing, and storage as well as providing proof
of satisfaction of any penalties, fines, or forfeitures before redemption((.
The notice must also state)); and

(i) A statement
that the registered owner is ineligible to purchase the vehicle at the
abandoned vehicle auction, if held.

(3) In the case of an
abandoned vehicle, or other item of personal property registered or titled with
the department, within twenty-four hours after receiving information on the
owners from the department through the abandoned vehicle report, the tow truck
operator shall send by certified mail, with return receipt requested, a notice
of custody and sale to the legal and registered owners.

(4) If the date on
which a notice required by subsection (3) of this section is to be mailed falls
upon a Saturday, Sunday, or a postal holiday, the notice may be mailed on the
next day that is neither a Saturday, Sunday, nor a postal holiday.

(5) No
notices need be sent to the legal or registered owners of an impounded vehicle
or other item of personal property registered or titled with the department, if
the vehicle or personal property has been redeemed.

Sec. 3. RCW 46.55.120 and 2000 c
193 s 1 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) Vehicles or other
items of personal property registered or titled with the department that are
impounded by registered tow truck operators pursuant to RCW 46.55.080,
46.55.085, 46.55.113, or 9A.88.140 may be redeemed or released only
under the following circumstances:

(a) Only the legal
owner, the registered owner, a person authorized in writing by the registered
owner or the vehicle's insurer, a person who is determined and verified by the
operator to have the permission of the registered owner of the vehicle or other
item of personal property registered or titled with the department, or one who
has purchased a vehicle or item of personal property registered or titled with
the department from the registered owner who produces proof of ownership or written
authorization and signs a receipt therefor, may redeem an impounded vehicle or
items of personal property registered or titled with the department. In
addition, a vehicle impounded because the operator is in violation of RCW
46.20.342(1)(c) shall not be released until a person eligible to redeem it
under this subsection (1)(a) satisfies the requirements of (e) of this
subsection, including paying all towing, removal, and storage fees,
notwithstanding the fact that the hold was ordered by a government agency. If
the department's records show that the operator has been convicted of a
violation of RCW 46.20.342 or a similar local ordinance within the past five
years, the vehicle may be held for up to thirty days at the written direction
of the agency ordering the vehicle impounded. A vehicle impounded because the
operator is arrested for a violation of RCW 46.20.342 may be released only
pursuant to a written order from the agency that ordered the vehicle impounded
or from the court having jurisdiction. ((An agency may issue a written
order to release pursuant to a provision of an applicable state agency rule or
local ordinance authorizing release on the basis of economic or personal
hardship to the spouse of the operator, taking into consideration public safety
factors, including the operator's criminal history and driving record.))

If a vehicle is
impounded because the operator is in violation of RCW 46.20.342(1) (a) or (b),
the vehicle may be held for up to thirty days at the written direction of the
agency ordering the vehicle impounded. However, if the department's records
show that the operator has been convicted of a violation of RCW 46.20.342(1)
(a) or (b) or a similar local ordinance within the past five years, the vehicle
may be held at the written direction of the agency ordering the vehicle
impounded for up to sixty days, and for up to ninety days if the operator has
two or more such prior offenses. If a vehicle is impounded because the
operator is arrested for a violation of RCW 46.20.342, the vehicle may not be
released until a person eligible to redeem it under this subsection (1)(a)
satisfies the requirements of (e) of this subsection, including paying all
towing, removal, and storage fees, notwithstanding the fact that the hold was
ordered by a government agency.

(b) If the vehicle is
directed to be held for a suspended license impound, a person who desires to
redeem the vehicle at the end of the period of impound shall within five days
of the impound at the request of the tow truck operator pay a security deposit
to the tow truck operator of not more than one-half of the applicable impound
storage rate for each day of the proposed suspended license impound. The tow
truck operator shall credit this amount against the final bill for removal,
towing, and storage upon redemption. The tow truck operator may accept other
sufficient security in lieu of the security deposit. If the person desiring to
redeem the vehicle does not pay the security deposit or provide other security
acceptable to the tow truck operator, the tow truck operator may process and
sell at auction the vehicle as an abandoned vehicle within the normal time
limits set out in RCW 46.55.130(1). The security deposit required by this
section may be paid and must be accepted at any time up to twenty-four hours
before the beginning of the auction to sell the vehicle as abandoned. The
registered owner is not eligible to purchase the vehicle at the auction, and
the tow truck operator shall sell the vehicle to the highest bidder who is not
the registered owner.

(c) Notwithstanding (b)
of this subsection, a rental car business may immediately redeem a rental
vehicle it owns by payment of the costs of removal, towing, and storage,
whereupon the vehicle will not be held for a suspended license impound.

(d) Notwithstanding (b)
of this subsection, a motor vehicle dealer or lender with a perfected security
interest in the vehicle may redeem or lawfully repossess a vehicle immediately
by payment of the costs of removal, towing, and storage, whereupon the vehicle
will not be held for a suspended license impound. A motor vehicle dealer or
lender with a perfected security interest in the vehicle may not knowingly and
intentionally engage in collusion with a registered owner to repossess and then
return or resell a vehicle to the registered owner in an attempt to avoid a
suspended license impound. However, this provision does not preclude a vehicle
dealer or a lender with a perfected security interest in the vehicle from
repossessing the vehicle and then selling, leasing, or otherwise disposing of
it in accordance with chapter 62A.9A RCW, including providing redemption
rights to the debtor under RCW ((62A.9-506)) 62A.9A-623. If the
debtor is the registered owner of the vehicle, the debtor's right to redeem the
vehicle under chapter 62A.9A RCW is conditioned upon the debtor
obtaining and providing proof from the impounding authority or court having
jurisdiction that any fines, penalties, and forfeitures owed by the registered
owner, as a result of the suspended license impound, have been paid, and proof
of the payment must be tendered to the vehicle dealer or lender at the time the
debtor tenders all other obligations required to redeem the vehicle. Vehicle
dealers or lenders are not liable for damages if they rely in good faith on an
order from the impounding agency or a court in releasing a vehicle held under a
suspended license impound.

(e) The vehicle or
other item of personal property registered or titled with the department shall
be released upon the presentation to any person having custody of the vehicle
of commercially reasonable tender sufficient to cover the costs of towing,
storage, or other services rendered during the course of towing, removing,
impounding, or storing any such vehicle, with credit being given for the amount
of any security deposit paid under (b) of this subsection. In addition, if a
vehicle is impounded because the operator was arrested for a violation of RCW
46.20.342 or 46.20.345 and was being operated by the registered owner when it
was impounded under local ordinance or agency rule, it must not be released to
any person until the registered owner establishes with the agency that ordered
the vehicle impounded or the court having jurisdiction that any penalties, fines,
or forfeitures owed by him or her have been satisfied. Registered tow truck
operators are not liable for damages if they rely in good faith on an order
from the impounding agency or a court in releasing a vehicle held under a
suspended license impound. Commercially reasonable tender shall include,
without limitation, cash, major bank credit cards issued by financial
institutions, or personal checks drawn on Washington state branches of
financial institutions if accompanied by two pieces of valid identification,
one of which may be required by the operator to have a photograph. If the
towing firm cannot determine through the customer's bank or a check
verification service that the presented check would be paid by the bank or
guaranteed by the service, the towing firm may refuse to accept the check. Any
person who stops payment on a personal check or credit card, or does not make
restitution within ten days from the date a check becomes insufficient due to
lack of funds, to a towing firm that has provided a service pursuant to this
section or in any other manner defrauds the towing firm in connection with
services rendered pursuant to this section shall be liable for damages in the
amount of twice the towing and storage fees, plus costs and reasonable attorney's
fees.

(2)(a) The registered
tow truck operator shall give to each person who seeks to redeem an impounded
vehicle, or item of personal property registered or titled with the department,
written notice of the right of redemption and opportunity for a hearing, which
notice shall be accompanied by a form to be used for requesting a hearing, the
name of the person or agency authorizing the impound, and a copy of the towing
and storage invoice. The registered tow truck operator shall maintain a record
evidenced by the redeeming person's signature that such notification was
provided.

(b) Any person seeking
to redeem an impounded vehicle under this section has a right to a hearing in
the district or municipal court for the jurisdiction in which the vehicle was
impounded to contest the validity of the impoundment or the amount of towing
and storage charges. The district court has jurisdiction to determine the
issues involving all impoundments including those authorized by the state or
its agents. The municipal court has jurisdiction to determine the issues
involving impoundments authorized by agents of the municipality. Any request
for a hearing shall be made in writing on the form provided for that purpose
and must be received by the appropriate court within ten days of the date the
opportunity was provided for in subsection (2)(a) of this section and more than
five days before the date of the auction. At the time of the filing of the
hearing request, the petitioner shall pay to the court clerk a filing fee in
the same amount required for the filing of a suit in district court. If the
hearing request is not received by the court within the ten-day period, the
right to a hearing is waived and the registered owner is liable for any towing,
storage, or other impoundment charges permitted under this chapter. Upon
receipt of a timely hearing request, the court shall proceed to hear and
determine the validity of the impoundment.

(3)(a) The court,
within five days after the request for a hearing, shall notify the registered
tow truck operator, the person requesting the hearing if not the owner, the
registered and legal owners of the vehicle or other item of personal property
registered or titled with the department, and the person or agency authorizing
the impound in writing of the hearing date and time.

(b) At the hearing, the
person or persons requesting the hearing may produce any relevant evidence to
show that the impoundment, towing, or storage fees charged were not proper.
The court may consider a written report made under oath by the officer who
authorized the impoundment in lieu of the officer's personal appearance at the
hearing.

(c) At the conclusion
of the hearing, the court shall determine whether the impoundment was proper,
whether the towing or storage fees charged were in compliance with the posted
rates, and who is responsible for payment of the fees. The court may not
adjust fees or charges that are in compliance with the posted or contracted
rates.

(d) If the impoundment
is found proper, the impoundment, towing, and storage fees as permitted under
this chapter together with court costs shall be assessed against the person or
persons requesting the hearing, unless the operator did not have a signed and
valid impoundment authorization from a private property owner or an authorized
agent.

(e) If the impoundment
is determined to be in violation of this chapter, then the registered and legal
owners of the vehicle or other item of personal property registered or titled
with the department shall bear no impoundment, towing, or storage fees, and any
security shall be returned or discharged as appropriate, and the person or
agency who authorized the impoundment shall be liable for any towing, storage,
or other impoundment fees permitted under this chapter. The court shall enter
judgment in favor of the registered tow truck operator against the person or
agency authorizing the impound for the impoundment, towing, and storage fees
paid. In addition, the court shall enter judgment in favor of the registered
and legal owners of the vehicle, or other item of personal property registered
or titled with the department, for the amount of the filing fee required by law
for the impound hearing petition as well as reasonable damages for loss of the
use of the vehicle during the time the same was impounded, for not less than
fifty dollars per day, against the person or agency authorizing the impound.
However, if an impoundment arising from an alleged violation of RCW 46.20.342
or 46.20.345 is determined to be in violation of this chapter, then the law
enforcement officer directing the impoundment and the government employing the
officer are not liable for damages if the officer relied in good faith and
without gross negligence on the records of the department in ascertaining that
the operator of the vehicle had a suspended or revoked driver's license. If
any judgment entered is not paid within fifteen days of notice in writing of
its entry, the court shall award reasonable attorneys' fees and costs against
the defendant in any action to enforce the judgment. Notice of entry of
judgment may be made by registered or certified mail, and proof of mailing may
be made by affidavit of the party mailing the notice. Notice of the entry of
the judgment shall read essentially as follows:

TO: . . . . . .

YOU
ARE HEREBY NOTIFIED JUDGMENT was entered against you in the
. . . . . . Court located at
. . . . . . in the sum of
$. . . . . ., in an action entitled
. . . . . ., Case No. . . . . YOU ARE
FURTHER NOTIFIED that attorneys fees and costs will be awarded against you
under RCW . . . if the judgment is not paid within 15 days of the
date of this notice.

DATED
this . . . . day of . . . . . ., (year)
. . .

Signature
..................

Typed
name and address

of
party mailing notice

(4) Any impounded
abandoned vehicle or item of personal property registered or titled with the
department that is not redeemed within fifteen days of mailing of the notice of
custody and sale as required by RCW 46.55.110(3) shall be sold at public auction
in accordance with all the provisions and subject to all the conditions of RCW
46.55.130. A vehicle or item of personal property registered or titled with
the department may be redeemed at any time before the start of the auction upon
payment of the applicable towing and storage fees.

(5)(a) For a vehicle
that is impounded by a registered tow truck operator under RCW 46.55.080,
46.55.085, 46.55.113, or 9A.88.140, an agency shall provide the following
persons the opportunity to submit a written request for release of the vehicle
on the basis of economic or personal hardship:

(i) The spouse of
the operator, taking into consideration public safety factors, including the
operator's criminal history and driving record; and

(ii) The owner of
the vehicle if the owner was not the operator of the vehicle when it was
impounded and if the owner has not received a prior release under this
subsection (5) for hardship to the owner.

(b) The agency shall
make a final decision to grant or reject the request no later than seven days
after receipt by the agency.

(c) If a vehicle is
released to the owner under this subsection (5), the owner has a cause of
action against the operator of the vehicle for any removal, towing, storage, or
other impoundment fees, reasonable damages for loss of the use of the vehicle
during the time the vehicle was impounded, and reasonable attorneys' fees and
costs paid by the owner to gain the release of the vehicle.

Sec. 4. RCW 46.63.020 and 2001 c
325 s 4 are each amended to read as follows:

Failure to perform any
act required or the performance of any act prohibited by this title or an
equivalent administrative regulation or local law, ordinance, regulation, or
resolution relating to traffic including parking, standing, stopping, and
pedestrian offenses, is designated as a traffic infraction and may not be
classified as a criminal offense, except for an offense contained in the
following provisions of this title or a violation of an equivalent
administrative regulation or local law, ordinance, regulation, or resolution:

(1) RCW 46.09.120(2)
relating to the operation of a nonhighway vehicle while under the influence of
intoxicating liquor or a controlled substance;

(2) RCW 46.09.130
relating to operation of nonhighway vehicles;

(3) RCW 46.10.090(2)
relating to the operation of a snowmobile while under the influence of
intoxicating liquor or narcotics or habit‑forming drugs or in a manner
endangering the person of another;

(4) RCW 46.10.130
relating to the operation of snowmobiles;

(5) Chapter 46.12 RCW
relating to certificates of ownership and registration ((and)),
markings indicating that a vehicle has been destroyed or declared a total loss,
and causing a postal cancellation to reflect an earlier date;

(6) RCW 46.16.010
relating to initial registration of motor vehicles;

(7) RCW 46.16.011
relating to permitting unauthorized persons to drive;

(8) RCW 46.16.160
relating to vehicle trip permits;

(9) RCW 46.16.381(2)
relating to knowingly providing false information in conjunction with an
application for a special placard or license plate for disabled persons'
parking;

(10) RCW 46.20.005
relating to driving without a valid driver's license;

(11) RCW 46.20.091
relating to false statements regarding a driver's license or instruction
permit;

(12) RCW 46.20.0921
relating to the unlawful possession and use of a driver's license;

(13) RCW 46.20.342
relating to driving with a suspended or revoked license or status;

(14) RCW 46.20.345
relating to the operation of a motor vehicle with a suspended or revoked
license;

(15) RCW 46.20.410
relating to the violation of restrictions of an occupational driver's license;

(16) RCW 46.20.740
relating to operation of a motor vehicle without an ignition interlock device
in violation of a license notation that the device is required;

(17) RCW 46.20.750
relating to assisting another person to start a vehicle equipped with an
ignition interlock device;

(18) RCW 46.25.170
relating to commercial driver's licenses;

(19) Chapter 46.29 RCW
relating to financial responsibility;

(20) RCW 46.30.040
relating to providing false evidence of financial responsibility;

(21) RCW 46.37.435
relating to wrongful installation of sunscreening material;

(22) RCW 46.44.180
relating to operation of mobile home pilot vehicles;

(23) RCW 46.48.175
relating to the transportation of dangerous articles;

(24) RCW 46.52.010
relating to duty on striking an unattended car or other property;

(25) RCW 46.52.020
relating to duty in case of injury to or death of a person or damage to an
attended vehicle;

(26) RCW 46.52.090
relating to reports by repairmen, storagemen, and appraisers;

(27) RCW 46.52.130
relating to confidentiality of the driving record to be furnished to an
insurance company, an employer, and an alcohol/drug assessment or treatment
agency;

(28) RCW 46.55.020
relating to engaging in the activities of a registered tow truck operator
without a registration certificate;

(29) RCW 46.55.035
relating to prohibited practices by tow truck operators;

(30) RCW 46.61.015
relating to obedience to police officers, flaggers, or fire fighters;

(31) RCW 46.61.020
relating to refusal to give information to or cooperate with an officer;

(32) RCW 46.61.022
relating to failure to stop and give identification to an officer;

(33) RCW 46.61.024
relating to attempting to elude pursuing police vehicles;

(34) RCW 46.61.500
relating to reckless driving;

(35) RCW 46.61.502 and
46.61.504 relating to persons under the influence of intoxicating liquor or
drugs;

(36) RCW 46.61.503
relating to a person under age twenty-one driving a motor vehicle after
consuming alcohol;

(37) RCW 46.61.520
relating to vehicular homicide by motor vehicle;

(38) RCW 46.61.522
relating to vehicular assault;

(39) RCW 46.61.5249
relating to first degree negligent driving;

(40) RCW 46.61.527(4)
relating to reckless endangerment of roadway workers;

(41) RCW 46.61.530
relating to racing of vehicles on highways;

(42) RCW 46.61.685
relating to leaving children in an unattended vehicle with the motor running;

(43) RCW 46.61.740
relating to theft of motor vehicle fuel;

(44) RCW 46.64.010
relating to unlawful cancellation of or attempt to cancel a traffic citation;

(45) RCW 46.64.048
relating to attempting, aiding, abetting, coercing, and committing crimes;

(46) Chapter 46.65 RCW
relating to habitual traffic offenders;

(47) RCW 46.68.010
relating to false statements made to obtain a refund;

(48) Chapter 46.70 RCW
relating to unfair motor vehicle business practices, except where that chapter
provides for the assessment of monetary penalties of a civil nature;

(49) Chapter 46.72 RCW
relating to the transportation of passengers in for hire vehicles;

(50) RCW 46.72A.060 relating
to limousine carrier insurance;

(51) RCW 46.72A.070
relating to operation of a limousine without a vehicle certificate;

(52) RCW 46.72A.080
relating to false advertising by a limousine carrier;

(53) Chapter 46.80 RCW
relating to motor vehicle wreckers;

(54) Chapter 46.82 RCW
relating to driver's training schools;

(55) RCW 46.87.260
relating to alteration or forgery of a cab card, letter of authority, or other
temporary authority issued under chapter 46.87 RCW;

(56) RCW
46.87.290 relating to operation of an unregistered or unlicensed vehicle under
chapter 46.87 RCW.

---
END ---