BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF
WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec.
1. A new section is added
to chapter 82.08 RCW to read as follows:

(1) The tax levied by
RCW 82.08.020 does not apply to the sale of items to a nonprofit wish granting
organization for donation to children served by the organization.

(2) For purposes of
this section and section 2 of this act:

(a) "Wish granting
organization" means an organization whose purpose is to provide services
in the granting of wishes or dreams to children that are seriously or
critically ill or injured.

(b)
"Nonprofit" means an organization exempt from federal income tax
under section 501(c)(3) of the federal internal revenue code of 1986 (26 U.S.C.
Sec. 501(c)(3)).

(3) In order to claim
an exemption under this section, the purchaser must provide the seller with an
exemption certificate in a form and manner prescribed by the department. The
seller shall retain a copy of the certificate for the seller's files.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
2. A new section is added
to chapter 82.12 RCW to read as follows:

(1) The provisions of
this chapter do not apply with respect to the use of items by a nonprofit wish
granting organization acquired for donation to children served by the
organization, or to the use of donated items by children served by the
organization.

(2) The
definitions in section 1 of this act apply to this section.

---
END ---