BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF
WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1. RCW 74.08A.010 and 1997
c 58 s 103 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) A family that
includes an adult who has received temporary assistance for needy families for
sixty months after July 27, 1997, shall be ineligible for further temporary
assistance for needy families assistance.

(2) For the purposes of
applying the rules of this section, the department shall count any month in
which an adult family member received a temporary assistance for needy families
cash assistance grant unless the assistance was provided when the family member
was a minor child and not the head of the household or married to the head of
the household.

(3) The department
shall refer recipients who require specialized assistance to appropriate
department programs, crime victims' programs through the department of
community, trade, and economic development, or the crime victims' compensation
program of the department of labor and industries.

(4) The department may
exempt a recipient and the recipient's family from the application of
subsection (1) of this section ((by reason of hardship)) if a
recipient is physically or mentally incapacitated to a degree that does not
allow him or her to meet the participation requirements of the WorkFirst
program, if the recipient is caring for a physically or mentally incapacitated
family member, or if the recipient meets the family violence options of
section 402(A)(7) of Title IVA of the federal social security act as amended by
P.L. 104-193. The number of recipients and their families exempted from
subsection (1) of this section for a fiscal year shall not exceed twenty
percent of the average monthly number of recipients and their families to which
assistance is provided under the temporary assistance for needy families
program.

(5) The
department shall not exempt a recipient and his or her family from the
application of subsection (1) of this section until after the recipient has
received fifty-two months of assistance under this chapter.

--- END ---