BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF
WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec.
1. The legislature finds that
state-produced agricultural products are of the highest quality, transported
the least distance, and are the freshest agricultural products available in
Washington state. The legislature further finds that providing improved
markets for the richly diversified agricultural commodities produced in
Washington is needed to stabilize and enhance the rural and agricultural
economies in Washington.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
2. A new section is added
to chapter 43.19 RCW to read as follows:

The director of general
administration, through the state purchasing and material control director,
must require that, if available and competitively priced, Washington fruit,
vegetables, and agricultural products be purchased for use in state institutions
and state-supported facilities.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 3. This act is necessary for
the immediate preservation of the public peace, health, or safety, or support
of the state government and its existing public institutions, and takes effect
immediately.

---
END ---