BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF
WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec.
1. A new section is added
to chapter 36.01 RCW to read as follows:

(1) The governing body
of any county may by ordinance levy a tax on the privilege of conducting any of
the following businesses within the territorial boundaries of the county.

(a) An electrical
energy business;

(b) A natural or
manufactured gas distribution business;

(c) A steam energy
business;

(d) A sewer business;

(e) A water
distribution business;

(f) A solid waste
collection business; and

(g) A telephone
business.

(2)(a) The rate of tax
shall not exceed one percent of the gross revenues derived by businesses,
except for telephone businesses as provided in (b) of this subsection, from
sales made within the county, exclusive of sales for resale. The rate imposed
on each business must be uniform as to all businesses in that class.

(b) A county may not
impose a tax on the gross revenues derived by a telephone business which
represents charges to another telecommunication company, as defined in RCW
80.04.010, for connecting fees, switching charges, or carrier access charges
relating to intrastate toll telephone services, or for access to, or charges
for, interstate services, or charges for network telephone service that is
purchased for the purpose of resale.

(c) By a vote of the
people the county may impose a rate of tax not to exceed three percent of the
gross revenues. In addition, by a vote of the people the county may include
the gross revenues derived from sales for resale made by any business except
for a telephone business in the gross revenues subject to tax.

(3) In addition to the
provisions for levying and collecting a tax, the ordinance must include, but is
not limited to, the following provisions:

(a) Exemptions,
deductions, and credits;

(b) Place of sale; and

(c) Due dates and
penalties.

(4) Money collected
under this section must be used exclusively for any of the following purposes:

(a) To assist the
criminal justice system. Activities assisting the criminal justice system may
include police protection, mitigation of congested court systems, relief for
overcrowded jails, domestic violence services, community and legal advocates,
hearings and ancillary services related to at-risk youth, truancy, and children
in need of services;

(b) To maintain and
improve the health of citizens. Activities maintaining and improving the
health of citizens may include providing access to personal health and
preventative care, and providing for environmental health protection services;

(c) To provide for
human services. Activities that provide for human services may include
providing for the care of persons who, as a result of their economic, social,
or health condition require financial assistance, institutional care, or
rehabilitation.

(5) The tax authorized
by this section is in addition to other taxes and does not prevent any city or
town within the taxing county, when authorized by law, from imposing within its
corporate limits a tax of the same or similar kind.

(6) For the purposes of
this section, unless the context clearly requires otherwise, the following
definitions apply.

(a) "Electrical
energy business" means the business of producing, distributing, or selling
electrical energy.

(b) "Natural or
manufactured gas distribution business" means the business of operating a
plant or system for the production, sale, or distribution of natural or
manufactured gas by a pipeline.

(c) "Steam energy
business" means the business of operating a plant or system for the
production, sale, or distribution of steam used for energy.

(d) "Sewer
business" means a business that collects, treats, and/or disposes of
sewage. A sewer business may include storm or surface water drainage and
channeling facilities.

(e) "Water
distribution business" means the business of operating a plant or system
for the production, sale, or distribution of water.

(f) "Solid waste
collection business" means the business of collecting, hauling,
transferring, and/or storing garbage or other materials discarded as worthless.

(g)
"Telephone business" means the business of providing network
telephone service as that phrase is defined in RCW 82.04.065 and includes
cooperative or farmer line telephone companies or associations operating an
exchange.

--- END ---