BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF
WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec.
1. The legislature finds
that it is important for the state to establish a system of licensure and
regulation to ensure the safe and sound operation of money transmission and
currency exchange businesses, to ensure that these businesses are not used for
criminal purposes, to promote confidence in the state's financial system, and
to protect the public interest. The legislature also finds that the creation
of an effective regulatory scheme will require careful consideration of the
current practices of small community-based money transmission or currency
exchange businesses, the role such businesses play in local communities, as
well as an assessment of the needs and practices of corporate financial
institutions. To achieve these ends in a manner that both serves the general
public interest and that is sensitive to the needs of smaller communities, the
legislature intends to study current business practices regarding both money
transmission and currency exchange in this state, and examine pertinent
regulatory schemes and policies in other jurisdictions.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
2. (1) A joint legislative
task force on licensing and regulating money transmitters and currency
exchangers is established. The joint task force shall consist of ten members
of the legislature appointed by the speaker of the house of representatives and
the president of the senate as follows:

(a) Three members from
the majority caucus and two members from the minority caucus of the house of
representatives, with at least one member from each caucus being a member of
the house financial institutions and insurance committee; and

(b) Three members from
the majority caucus and two members from the minority caucus of the senate,
with at least one member from each caucus being a member of the senate labor,
commerce and financial institutions committee.

(2) The joint task
force shall, when necessary, receive technical assistance from the department
of financial institutions, and the department shall make staff available for
this purpose. The department shall cooperate with the task force, maintain a
liaison representative who is a nonvoting member, and provide appropriate
technical or other assistance to small businesses or local, immigrant, or
ethnic communities to comply with federal registration requirements dealing
with money transmitters and currency exchangers.

(3) The joint task
force may, when necessary, consult with individuals from the public and private
sector or ask such persons to establish an advisory committee.

(4) The staff of senate
committee services and the office of program research of the house of
representatives shall provide administrative and clerical assistance to the
joint task force.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
3. The joint task force
shall review, but not be limited to, the following issues:

(1) Make
recommendations for a system of licensure that is in compliance with federal
laws and regulations, and that is responsive to the particular statutory
framework of licensure for other money service industries in Washington state;

(2) Identify the
barriers to licensing, either directly or as an affiliate, that may exist for
small community-based businesses or local, immigrant, or ethnic communities
which may not typically use traditional financial depository institutions;

(3) Identify how money
transmission and currency exchange licensing regulations in other states have
affected small community-based businesses or local, immigrant, or ethnic
communities which may not typically use traditional financial depository
institutions in those states, and how other states have addressed issues around
technical assistance and access to traditional financial institutions that
these businesses and communities face; and

(4) Recommend
implementation of a regulatory scheme that will minimize adverse impact on
small community-based businesses or local, immigrant, or ethnic communities
that may not typically use traditional financial depository institutions, and
that will minimize disruption to the legitimate purposes for which money
transmission and currency exchange services currently operate in these communities.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
4. The joint task force
shall meet as and when it sees fit in order to properly carry out the functions
and duties set forth in this act.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
5. All expenses of the joint
task force, including travel, shall be paid jointly by the senate and the house
of representatives.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
6. The joint task force
shall report its findings and recommendations to the legislature by December 1,
2002.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 7. This act expires July 1,
2003.

---
END ---