BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF
WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec.
1. The legislature finds
that the wildlife resources of the state are highly valued. The programs,
activities, and policies of the state that preserve, protect, and manage
wildlife and provide public access for viewing and for hunting are critical to
the resource. The abundance of wildlife and conditions for wildlife could be
further improved by the establishment of a nonprofit wildlife conservation
foundation. It is the intent of the legislature to protect and enhance the wildlife
conservation capabilities of the state, to increase the abundance of wildlife,
and to ensure the stability of wildlife populations through private benefactors
contributing to a nonprofit wildlife conservation foundation.

Providing a
tax-deductible method for individuals and groups to contribute in this manner
would benefit the wildlife of the state. Several states have created nonprofit
wildlife conservation foundations that are successful in raising millions of
dollars every year for the stewardship of wildlife resources. Therefore, the
legislature finds that it is in the public interest to create a nonprofit
foundation for the purpose of increasing funds available for the preservation,
protection, and management of the state's wildlife.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
2. The definitions in this
section apply throughout this chapter, unless the context clearly requires
otherwise.

(1)
"Foundation" means the Washington wildlife conservation foundation
created in section 3 of this act.

(2) "Board"
means the Washington wildlife conservation foundation board of directors
created in section 5 of this act.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
3. The board shall file
articles of incorporation in accordance with the Washington nonprofit
corporation act, chapter 24.03 RCW, to establish the Washington wildlife
conservation foundation. The foundation shall not be an agency,
instrumentality, or political subdivision of the state.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
4. The purpose of the
foundation is to:

(1) Improve the
abundance and conditions for wildlife within the state while working in concert
with the charitable, educational, scientific, and recreational programs,
projects, and policies of the state;

(2) Solicit and accept
aid or contributions consistent with the stated intent of the donor and the
goals of the foundation;

(3) Solicit and accept
grants for the acquisition, construction, improvement, and development of state
agency projects;

(4) Solicit and accept
private funding and donations that assist in enhancing and preserving
Washington's wildlife species and the habitats upon which they depend.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
5. (1) The foundation shall
have a board of directors consisting of nine members. The fish and wildlife
commission must appoint nine members to the board by September 1, 2002. No
member of the board may be an active state employee.

(2) No member of the
board may receive compensation or a per diem.

(3) Members shall serve
four-year terms. Of the initial members, one must be appointed for a one-year
term, one must be appointed for a two-year term, one must be appointed for a
three-year term, and the remainder must be appointed for a four-year term.
Members of the board may serve up to a maximum of three terms. At the end of a
term, a member may continue to serve until a successor has been appointed.

(4) The board shall
meet and organize, and may designate by a majority vote a treasurer, secretary,
or any additional officers needed to carry out the activities of the
foundation. The board shall adopt bylaws of the foundation.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
6. The foundation may accept
gifts or grants from any governmental agency or from any person, firm, or
corporation. The foundation may expend receipts on activities consistent with
the purposes of the foundation in section 4 of this act, and in a manner
consistent with any requirement of the grant, gift, or bequest.

Funds collected by the
foundation shall be considered private funds and shall be held in an
appropriate account outside of the state treasury. The foundation may contract
with the state auditor or with a private auditor for an audit of funds. The
foundation and its officers are responsible for the approval and recording of
receipts, approval of payments, and the proper filing of required reports.
Funds provided by the foundation may not be used to supplant any local, state,
or federal funding source.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
7. The foundation must
comply with the requirements of the open public meetings act, chapter 42.30
RCW.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
8. If any provision of this
act or its application to any person or circumstance is held invalid, the
remainder of the act or the application of the provision to other persons or
circumstances is not affected.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 9. Sections 1 through 8 of
this act constitute a new chapter in Title 77 RCW.

---
END ---