BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF
WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec.
1. A new section is added
to chapter 82.04 RCW to read as follows:

(1) This chapter does
not apply to amounts received by any person for research and development under
the federal small business innovation research program (114 Stat. 2763A; 15
U.S.C. Sec. 638 et seq.).

(2) In addition to any
other reporting requirements under this chapter, a person taking the tax
exemption under this chapter must complete and return the form in RCW 82.32.---
(section 2, chapter . . . (Substitute House Bill No. 2413), Laws of
2002) to the department of revenue by March 1st of each year. A person who
fails to report is ineligible on a prospective basis for business incentives
identified in RCW 82.32.--- (section 1, chapter . . . (Substitute
House Bill No. 2413), Laws of 2002), subject to the provisions of RCW
82.32.---(4) (section 2(4), chapter . . . (Substitute House Bill No.
2413), Laws of 2002).

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 2. This act takes effect
January 1, 2003.

---
END ---