BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF
WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec.
1. The legislature finds
that businesses that match foreign women for marriage to men in the United
States promote and advertise women as commodities and perpetuate sexist and
racist stereotypes of foreign women. The legislature further finds that
foreign women entering the United States and the state of Washington as brides
through businesses that match foreign women to men in the United States often
suffer emotional and physical abuse at the hands of their husbands. These
women are less likely than citizens of the United States to report this abuse
because of a number of factors, including lack of knowledge of their rights
under the laws of the state of Washington and laws of the United States, fear
of deportation, and isolation from society because of a lack of English
language skills and unfamiliarity with the culture.

It is therefore the
intent of the legislature to provide protection to these women by regulating
businesses that match foreign women to men in the United States by requiring
these businesses to provide: To foreign women, information about their rights
under the laws, including the right to be free from emotional and physical abuse
and the resources available to them to combat such abuse; and to men in the
United States who are seeking social referral services with foreign women,
information on the culture and customs of the foreign women.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
2. The definitions in this
section apply throughout this chapter unless the context clearly requires
otherwise.

(1) "Client"
means a person seeking foreign social referral services through a foreign
social referral service agency.

(2)
"Department" means the department of licensing.

(3)
"Director" means the director of licensing or the director's
designee.

(4) "Foreign
social referral service agency" means a person or business entity that
provides domestic clients with social referral service matches to foreign
clients for compensation, such as computer dating agencies, video dating
agencies, and mail dating agencies, but does not include newspapers offering
personal advertisement services.

(5) "Foreign
social referral services" means those services primarily intended to
introduce or match domestic persons with foreign persons for social,
recreational, or romantic encounters.

(6) "Person"
means an individual, firm, association, corporation, partnership, limited
liability company, or other business entity.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
3. The director has the
following authority in administering this chapter:

(1) To adopt, amend,
and rescind rules as deemed necessary to carry out this chapter;

(2) To issue subpoenas
and administer oaths in connection with an investigation, hearing, or
proceeding held under this chapter;

(3) To take or cause
depositions to be taken and use other discovery procedures as needed in an
investigation, hearing, or proceeding held under this chapter;

(4) To compel
attendance of witnesses at hearings;

(5) In the course of
investigating a complaint or report of unprofessional conduct, to conduct
practice reviews;

(6) To take emergency
action ordering summary suspension of a license, or restriction or limitation
of the licensee's practice pending proceedings by the director;

(7) To use the office
of administrative hearings as authorized in chapter 34.12 RCW to conduct
hearings. However, the director or the director's designee shall make the
final decision in the hearing;

(8) To enter into
contracts for professional services determined to be necessary for adequate
enforcement of this chapter;

(9) To adopt standards
of professional conduct or practice;

(10) In the event of a
finding of unprofessional conduct by an applicant or license holder, to impose
sanctions against a license applicant or license holder as provided by this
chapter;

(11) To enter into an
assurance of discontinuance in lieu of issuing a statement of charges or
conducting a hearing. The assurance shall consist of a statement of the law in
question and an agreement to not violate the stated provision. The applicant or
license holder shall not be required to admit to any violation of the law, and
the assurance shall not be construed as such an admission. Violation of an
assurance under this subsection is grounds for disciplinary action;

(12) To designate
individuals authorized to sign subpoenas and statements of charges;

(13) To employ such
investigative, administrative, and clerical staff as necessary for the
enforcement of this chapter; and

(14) To compel the
attendance of witnesses at hearings.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
4. A person or business may
not offer foreign social referral services in the state of Washington without
having first obtained a foreign social referral service license issued by the
department.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
5. (1) The director may
investigate complaints concerning practice by unlicensed persons or business
for which a license is required by this chapter. In the investigation of the
complaints, the director has the same authority as provided under section 3 of
this act.

(2) The director may
issue a notice of intent to issue a cease and desist order to any person whom
the director has reason to believe is engaged in the unlicensed practice for
which a license is required by this chapter. The person to whom such a notice
is issued may request an adjudicative proceeding to contest the allegations.
The notice shall include a brief, plain statement of the alleged unlicensed
activities. The request for hearing must be filed within twenty days after
service of the notice of intent to issue a cease and desist order. The failure
to request a hearing constitutes a default, whereupon the director may enter a
permanent cease and desist order, which may include a civil fine. All
proceedings shall be conducted in accordance with chapter 34.05 RCW.

(3) If the director
makes a final determination that a person has engaged or is engaging in
unlicensed practice, the director may issue a permanent cease and desist
order. In addition, the director may impose a civil fine in an amount not
exceeding one thousand dollars for each day upon which the person engaged in
the unlicensed practice or operation of a business for which a license is
required by this chapter. The proceeds of such a fine shall be deposited in
the social referral service account.

(4) If the director
makes a written finding of fact that the public interest will be irreparably
harmed by delay in issuing an order, the director may issue a temporary cease
and desist order. The person receiving a temporary cease and desist order
shall be provided an opportunity for a prompt hearing. A temporary cease and
desist order remains in effect until further order of the director. The
failure to request a prompt or regularly scheduled hearing constitutes a
default, whereupon the director may enter a permanent cease and desist order,
which may include a civil fine.

(5) The cease and
desist order is conclusive proof of unlicensed practice and may be enforced
under RCW 7.21.060. This method of enforcement of the cease and desist order
or civil fine may be used in addition to, or as an alternative to, any
provisions for enforcement of agency orders set out in chapter 34.05 RCW.

(6) The attorney
general, a county prosecuting attorney, the director, or any person may, in
accordance with the laws of this state governing injunctions, maintain an
action in the name of the state of Washington to enjoin any person practicing
without a license for which a license is required by this chapter. All fees,
fines, forfeitures, and penalties collected or assessed by a court because of a
violation of this section shall be deposited in the social referral service
account.

(7) The civil remedies
in this section do not limit the ability to pursue criminal prosecution as authorized
in this chapter.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
6. A person who attempts to
obtain, obtains, or attempts to maintain a license by willful misrepresentation
or fraudulent representation is guilty of a gross misdemeanor.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
7. An application for
license must be made to the department on forms provided by the department and
must contain that information as the department reasonably requires. An
application for license must be accompanied by a license fee established by the
department under RCW 43.24.086.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
8. Upon receipt of an
application for a license and the license fee, the department must issue a
license if the applicant meets the requirements established under this
chapter. A license issued under this chapter must expire one year from the
date of issuance. A licensee may renew a license by filing a renewal
application with the department on forms provided by the department thirty days
before the license expiration date and paying a license renewal fee in an
amount determined by the department under RCW 43.24.086.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
9. An applicant must meet
the following minimum requirements to obtain a foreign social referral service
license:

(1) Be at least
eighteen years of age;

(2) Be a citizen or
lawful permanent resident of the United States;

(3) Be of good moral
character;

(4) Pay the required
application fee; and

(5) Comply with this
chapter.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
10. A foreign social referral
service agency shall:

(1) Require a client to
provide information on the client's employment, age, health status, and marital
history;

(2) Require a client to
provide information on a conviction or deferred prosecution for a domestic
violence offense, as defined in RCW 10.99.020, and information on a restraining
order or no-contact order issued in connection with a domestic violence charge;

(3) Provide to a
client, upon the client's request, the employment, age, health status, and
marital history of another client with whom the client has been matched or
selected;

(4) Provide to a
client, upon the client's request, information on another client with whom the
client is matched or selected regarding a conviction or deferred prosecution
for a domestic violence offense, as defined in RCW 10.99.020, and information
regarding a restraining order or no-contact order issued in connection with a
domestic violence charge;

(5) Inform a client
that the client may request the information listed in subsections (1) through
(4) of this section; and

(6) Require that a
United States citizen or lawful permanent resident who is matched to a resident
of a foreign country complete a cultural diversity education and training
course in the culture and customs of the foreign client.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
11. The following conduct,
acts, or conditions constitute unprofessional conduct for any license holder or
applicant under the jurisdiction of this chapter:

(1) The commission of
any act involving moral turpitude, dishonesty, or corruption relating to the
practice of the person's profession or operation of the person's business,
whether the act constitutes a crime or not. Upon a conviction, the judgment
and sentence is conclusive evidence at the ensuing disciplinary hearing of the
guilt of the license holder or applicant of the crime described in the
indictment or information, and of the person's violation of the statute on
which it is based. For the purposes of this section, conviction includes all
instances in which a plea of guilty or nolo contendere is the basis for the
conviction and all proceedings in which the sentence has been deferred or
suspended. Except as specifically provided by law, nothing in this section
abrogates the provisions of chapter 9.96A RCW. However, RCW 9.96A.020 does not
apply to a person who is required to register as a sex offender under RCW
9A.44.130;

(2) Misrepresentation
or concealment of a material fact in obtaining a license or in reinstatement
thereof;

(3) Advertising that is
false, deceptive, or misleading;

(4) Incompetence,
negligence, or malpractice that results in harm or damage to a consumer or that
creates an unreasonable risk that a consumer may be harmed or damaged;

(5) The suspension,
revocation, or restriction of a license to engage in any business or profession
by competent authority in any state, federal, or foreign jurisdiction. A
certified copy of the order, stipulation, or agreement is conclusive evidence
of the revocation, suspension, or restriction;

(6) Failure to
cooperate with the director by:

(a) Not furnishing any
papers or documents requested by the director;

(b) Not furnishing in
writing an explanation covering the matter contained in a complaint when
requested by the director;

(c) Not responding to a
subpoena issued by the director, whether or not the recipient of the subpoena
is the accused in the proceeding; or

(d) Not providing
authorized access, during regular business hours, to representatives of the
director conducting an investigation, inspection, or audit at facilities
utilized by the license holder or applicant;

(7) Failure to comply
with an order issued by the director;

(8) Violating any
lawful rule made by the director;

(9) Aiding or abetting
an unlicensed person to practice or operate a business or profession when a
license is required;

(10) Practice or
operation of a business or profession beyond the scope of practice or operation
as defined by law or rule;

(11) Misrepresentation
in any aspect of the conduct of the business or profession;

(12) Failure to
adequately supervise or oversee auxiliary staff, whether employees or
contractors, to the extent that consumers may be harmed or damaged;

(13) Conviction of any
gross misdemeanor or felony relating to the practice of the person's profession
or operation of the person's business. For the purposes of this subsection,
conviction includes all instances in which a plea of guilty or nolo contendere
is the basis for conviction and all proceedings in which the sentence has been
deferred or suspended. Except as specifically provided by law, nothing in this
section abrogates the provisions of chapter 9.96A RCW. However, RCW 9.96A.020
does not apply to a person who is required to register as a sex offender under
RCW 9A.44.130; and

(14) Interference with
an investigation or disciplinary action by willful misrepresentation of facts
before the director or the director's authorized representatives, or by the use
of threats or harassment against any consumer or witness to discourage them
from providing evidence in a disciplinary action or any other legal action, or
by the use of financial inducements to any consumer or witness to prevent or
attempt to prevent him or her from providing evidence in a disciplinary action.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
12. (1) Upon finding
unprofessional conduct, the director may issue an order providing for one or
any combination of the following:

(a) Revocation of the
license;

(b) Suspension of the
license for a fixed or indefinite term;

(c) Restriction or
limitation of the practice;

(d) Satisfactory
completion of a specific program of remedial education or treatment;

(e) Monitoring of the
practice in a manner directed by the director;

(f) Censure or
reprimand;

(g) Compliance with
conditions of probation for a designated period of time;

(h) Payment of a fine
for each violation found by the director, not to exceed five thousand dollars
per violation. The director must consider aggravating or mitigating
circumstances in assessing any fine. Funds received must be deposited in the
social referral service account;

(i) Denial of an
initial or renewal license application; or

(j) Other corrective
action.

(2) The director may
require reimbursement for the investigative costs incurred in investigating the
matter that resulted in issuance of an order under this section, but only if
any of the sanctions in subsection (1)(a) through (j) of this section is
ordered.

(3) Any of the actions
under this section may be totally or partly stayed by the director. In
determining what action is appropriate, the director must first consider what
sanctions are necessary to protect the public health, safety, or welfare. Only
after these provisions have been made may the director consider and include in
the order requirements designed to rehabilitate the license holder or
applicant. All costs associated with compliance with orders issued under this
section are the obligation of the license holder or applicant.

(4) The licensee or
applicant may enter into a stipulated disposition of charges that includes one
or more of the sanctions of this section, but only after a statement of charges
has been issued and the licensee has been afforded the opportunity for a
hearing and has elected on the record to forego such a hearing. The
stipulation shall either contain one or more specific findings of
unprofessional conduct or a statement by the licensee acknowledging that
evidence is sufficient to justify one or more specified findings of
unprofessional conduct. The stipulations entered into under this subsection
are considered formal disciplinary action for all purposes.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
13. An order pursuant to
proceedings authorized by this chapter, after due notice and findings in
accordance with this chapter and chapter 34.05 RCW, or an order of summary
suspension entered under this chapter, takes effect immediately upon its being
served. The order, if appealed to the court, may not be stayed pending the
appeal unless the director or court to which the appeal is taken enters an
order staying the order of the director, which stay shall provide for terms
necessary to protect the public.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
14. An individual who has
been disciplined or whose license has been denied by a director may appeal the
decision as provided in chapter 34.05 RCW.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
15. A foreign social referral
service agency may not condition payment, compensation, or other benefit to a
client on marriage between its clients.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
16. The social referral
service account is created in the state treasury. All fees received by the
department for licenses, registrations, renewals, examinations, and audits must
be forwarded to the state treasurer who must credit the money to the account.
All fines and civil penalties ordered pursuant to this chapter against holders
of licenses, certificates, or registrations issued under the provisions of this
chapter must be paid to the account. All expenses incurred in carrying out the
licensing and registration activities of the department under this chapter must
be paid from the account as authorized by legislative appropriation. Any
residue in the account shall be accumulated and shall not revert to the general
fund at the end of the biennium. All earnings of investments of balances in
the account shall be credited to the general fund.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
17. If any provision of this
act or its application to any person or circumstance is held invalid, the
remainder of the act or the application of the provision to other persons or
circumstances is not affected.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
18. This act takes effect
July 1, 2003.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 19. Sections 1 through 18 of
this act constitute a new chapter in Title 18 RCW.

---
END ---