BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF
WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1. RCW 19.29A.090 and 2001
c 214 s 28 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) Beginning January
1, 2002, each electric utility must provide to its retail electricity customers
a voluntary option to purchase qualified alternative energy resources in
accordance with this section.

(2) Each electric
utility must include with its retail electric customer's regular billing
statements, at least quarterly, a voluntary option to purchase qualified
alternative energy resources. The option may allow customers to purchase
qualified alternative energy resources at fixed or variable rates and for fixed
or variable periods of time, including but not limited to monthly, quarterly,
or annual purchase agreements. A utility may provide qualified alternative
energy resource options through either: (a) Resources it owns or contracts
for; or (b) the purchase of credits issued by a clearinghouse or other system
by which the utility may secure, for trade or other consideration, verifiable
evidence that a second party has a qualified alternative energy resource and
that the second party agrees to transfer such evidence exclusively to the
benefit of the utility.

(3) For the purposes of
this section, a "qualified alternative energy resource" means the
electricity produced from generation facilities that are fueled by: (a) Wind;
(b) solar energy; (c) geothermal energy; (d) landfill gas; (e) wave or tidal
action; (f) gas produced during the treatment of wastewater; (g) qualified
hydropower; or (h) biomass energy based on animal waste or solid organic
fuels from wood, forest, or field residues, or dedicated energy crops that do
not include wood pieces that have been treated with chemical preservatives such
as creosote, pentachlorophenol, or copper‑chrome‑arsenic.

(4) For the purposes of
this section, "qualified hydropower" means the energy produced
either: (a) As a result of modernizations or upgrades made after June 1, 1998,
to hydropower facilities operating on May 8, 2001, that have been demonstrated
to reduce the mortality of anadromous fish; or (b) by run of the river or run
of the canal hydropower facilities that are not responsible for obstructing the
passage of anadromous fish.

(5) The rates, terms,
conditions, and customer notification of each utility's option or options
offered in accordance with this section must be approved by the governing body
of the consumer-owned utility or by the commission for investor-owned
utilities. All costs and benefits associated with any option offered by an
electric utility under this section must be allocated to the customers who
voluntarily choose that option and may not be shifted to any customers who have
not chosen such option.

(6) Each
consumer-owned utility must report annually to the department and each
investor-owned utility must report annually to the commission beginning October
1, 2002, until October 1, 2012, describing the option or options it is offering
its customers under the requirements of this section, the rate of customer
participation, the amount of qualified alternative energy resources purchased
by customers, and the amount of utility investments in qualified alternative
energy resources. The department and the commission together shall report
annually to the legislature, beginning December 1, 2002, until December 1,
2012, with the results of the utility reports.

--- END ---