BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF
WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec.
1. The legislature finds
that the health and safety of its citizens, natural resources, and the
environment are vital interests of the state that must be protected to preserve
the state's quality of life. The legislature also finds that the state's economic
well-being is a vital interest that depends upon the development of fair,
coordinated environmental permitting processes that ensure that the state not
only protects natural resources, but also encourages appropriate activities
that stimulate growth and development. The legislature further finds that
during the past twenty years, Washington's environmental protection programs
have established strict standards to reduce pollution and protect public health
and safety and the environment.

The legislature finds
that as the number of environmental and land use laws have grown in Washington,
so have the number of permits required of business and government. The
increasing number of individual permits and permit authorities has generated
the potential for conflict, overlap, and duplication between the various state,
local, and federal permits. Lack of coordination in the processing of permit
applications may cause costly delays and frustration to the applicant.

The legislature finds
that not all project applicants require the same type of technical assistance.
While applicants with small projects may merely need information about local
and state permits, and assistance in applying for those permits,
intermediate-sized projects may require a facilitated facilitating permit
process. Large, complex projects may even need extensive coordination among
local, state, and federal agencies.

The legislature finds
that a range of assistance and coordination options should be available for
project applicants. The legislature further finds that citizens should be
provided with a reliable and consolidated source of information concerning
federal, state, and local environmental and land use laws and procedures that
might apply to any given proposal; facilitated interagency forums for
discussion of significant issues related to the multiple permitting processes
can be very useful for some project proponents; and finally, some applicants
may require active coordination of all applicable regulatory and land use
permitting procedures.

The legislature
declares that the purpose of this chapter is to provide efficient processes
that will assist businesses and citizens in complying with the environmental
and land use laws while protecting public health and safety and the environment.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
2. The definitions in this
section apply throughout this chapter unless the context clearly requires
otherwise.

(1) "Center"
means the permit assistance center established in section 3 of this act.

(2) "Permit"
includes any license, certificate, registration, permit, or other form of use
authorization required by a permit agency to engage in a particular activity.

(3) "Project"
means an activity, the conduct of which requires permits from one or more permit
agencies.

(4) "Use
authorization" means a lease, material purchase, easement, permit, or
other document authorizing the use of either state-owned aquatic lands or
materials, or both.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
3. (1) The permit assistance
center is created in the office of the governor. The center shall:

(a) Publish and keep
current one or more handbooks containing lists and explanations of all permit
laws. To the extent possible, the handbook must include relevant local, state,
federal, and tribal laws. A state agency or local government must provide a
reasonable number of copies of application forms, statutes, ordinances, rules,
handbooks, and other informational material requested by the center and must
otherwise fully cooperate with the center. The center must seek the
cooperation of relevant federal agencies and tribal governments;

(b) Establish, and make
known, a point of contact for distribution of the handbook and advice to the
public as to its interpretation in any given case;

(c) Work closely and
cooperatively with the business license center in providing efficient and
nonduplicative service to the public;

(d) Collect and
disseminate information to public and private entities on federal, state, local,
and tribal government programs that rely on private professional expertise to
assist governmental agencies in project permit review; and

(e) Provide an annual
performance report to the legislature and the public. The report must be based
on survey of customers.

(2) The center must
prioritize the expenditure of general fund moneys allotted to the center to
provide a set of services to the applicants of small projects.

(3) The center shall
work with state resource agencies, the governor's office, local government
officials, and the department of community, trade, and economic development to
create a range of permit assistance options for permit applicants. These
options include, but are not limited to, a centralized customer call center, a
web site for permitting information, facilitation services offered on a
regional basis, and a process for developing a coordinated permit process
utilizing a cost reimbursement system authorized under section 7 of this act.

(4) The center shall
also work to develop informal processes for dispute resolution between agencies
and permit applicants.

(5) To the maximum
extent possible, the center shall work with the transportation permit
efficiency and accountability committee established by chapter 47.06C RCW.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
4. The center shall operate
based on the principle that citizens of the state of Washington have the
following rights when asking for a permit, license, or permission to engage in
a lawful activity:

(1) The right to a date
in time for a decision on permits;

(2) The right to be
notified of the information required by the permitting agency or authorizing
agency in order to accept a completed application or issue a final decision;
and

(3) The right to know
the maximum amount of costs in fees, studies, or public processes that will be
incurred by the permit applicant.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
5. (1) Upon the request of a
project proponent, the center shall appoint a project facilitator to assist the
applicant in determining which regulatory requirements, processes, and permits
may be required for development and operation of the proposed project. The
project facilitator shall provide the information to the applicant and explain
the options available to the applicant in obtaining the required permits.

(2) If requested by the
applicant, the project facilitator shall facilitate a project scoping meeting.
The meeting may involve the project applicant, state agencies that will require
a permit or use authorization for the project, and the local governments in
whose jurisdiction the project is proposed. Federal agencies and tribal
governments that either issue or may require a permit, or that may require a
use authorization for the project, shall each be invited to participate in the
scoping meeting. All agencies participating in the scoping process are
encouraged to remain in communication for purposes of coordination throughout
the subsequent permit review processes until final permit decisions are made.

(3) The purpose of the
scoping meeting is to share perspectives and identify the issues and
information needs of concern to each participant with regard to the proposed
project, and jointly develop a strategy for managing the permitting process.
This project scoping process must be concluded within sixty days of the
applicant's request.

(a) During this review,
the permit agencies shall identify:

(i) The permits that
are required for the project;

(ii) A review of the
permit application forms and other application requirements of the agencies
that are participating in the scoping meeting;

(iii) The specific
information needs and issues of concern and their significance to each
participant with regard to the permitting processes involved;

(iv) Any statutory or
regulatory conflicts that might arise relating to differing legal authorities
and roles of the agencies issuing the permit or use authorization of the
project;

(v) Any state or local
jurisdiction or private sector liability that might result from permitting or
issuing a use authorization for the project;

(vi) Any natural
resources, including federal or state listed species, that might be adversely
affected by the permitting or authorizing decision; and

(vii) The permit
decision timelines that will be used by each permit agency, including the time
periods required to determine if the permit applications are complete, to
review the application or applications, and to process the component permits.
In the development of this timeline, full attention must be given to achieving
the maximum efficiencies possible through concurrent studies, consolidated
applications, hearings, and comment periods.

(b) Following this
project scoping review, the outcome shall be documented in written form and
furnished to the applicant, and be available to the public.

(c) Upon completion of
this review, the permitting and authorizing agencies and governments shall proceed
according to their respective statutes.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
6. (1) Upon request, a
permit applicant may also request that the center actively coordinate the
project permitting processes. This process shall be implemented through a cost
reimbursement contract developed under section 7 of this act.

(2) According to the
specific requirements contained in a cost reimbursement contract, the center
may convene a scoping meeting as outlined in section 5 of this act, serve as the
main point of contact for the permit applicant with regard to the coordinated
permit processes for the project, and manage the procedural aspects of that
processing consistent with existing laws. In carrying out these
responsibilities, the center shall ensure that the permit applicant has all the
information needed to apply for all the component permits that are incorporated
in the coordinated permit process for the project, coordinate the review of
those permits by the permit agencies, ensure that timely permit decisions are
made by the permit agencies, and assist in resolving any conflict or
inconsistency among the permit requirements and conditions that are to be
imposed by the permit agencies. The center shall maintain contact with the
applicant and local, state, and federal permit agencies to ensure that the
process is progressing as scheduled.

(3) Upon completion of
the cost reimbursement contract, each permit agency shall send at least one
representative qualified to make decisions concerning the applicability and
timelines associated with all permits administered by that jurisdiction. At
the request of the applicant, the center shall notify any relevant federal
agency or federally recognized tribe of the date of the meeting and invite that
agency's participation in the process.

(4) If a permit agency
or the applicant foresees, at any time, that it will be unable to meet its
obligations under the agreement, it shall notify the center of the problem.
The center shall notify the permit agencies and the applicant and, upon
agreement of all parties, adjust the schedule, or, if necessary, schedule
another work plan meeting.

(5) This chapter may
not be construed to limit or abridge the powers and duties granted to any
permit agency under the law that authorizes or requires the agency to issue a
permit or a use authorization for a project.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
7. (1) The center shall
negotiate a method of determining, collecting, and distributing permit fees and
cost reimbursement for the costs associated with carrying out the purposes of
this chapter, including the use of existing fees as set by statute or
administrative rule.

(2) The center may
enter into a written agreement with the applicant to recover from the applicant
the reasonable costs incurred by the center and permit agencies in carrying out
the requirements of this chapter.

(3) The center may
enter into a written agreement with the applicant to recover from the applicant
the reasonable costs incurred by outside independent consultants selected by
the center and permit agencies to perform permit review and processing tasks
consistent with the coordinated permit process.

(4) The center and
outside independent consultants may recover only the costs of performing those
permit services that are coordinated through the one-stop coordinated
permitting process established under this chapter. The billing process must
provide for accurate time and cost accounting and may include a billing cycle
that provides for progress payments.

(5) Prior to providing
reimbursement or fees to participating permit agencies under this chapter, the
center shall ensure that the participating permit agencies have made all the
permit decisions that are necessary for the incorporation of the permits into
the coordinated permit process and act on the component permits within the time
periods agreed to by the participating permit agencies under the process
outlined in section 6 of this act.

(6) The center shall
adopt a policy to administer cost reimbursement agreements executed under this
section. Cost reimbursement agreements administered by the center under this
section must be based on competitive bids that are awarded for each agreement
to the responsible bidder from a prequalified consultant roster that submitted
the lowest responsive bid as described in RCW 43.19.1911.

(7) Prior to entering
negotiation with the applicant on cost reimbursement, the center shall request
work load analyses for the permits from each permitting agency. These analyses
shall be available to the public. The center may only agree to reduce work
load if there is a good cause to do so and there is no significant impact on
environmental review.

(8) If independent
consultants are hired under the cost reimbursement agreement, they shall report
directly to the permitting agency.

(9) The center shall
develop guidance to ensure that, in developing cost reimbursement agreements,
conflict of interest problems are eliminated.

(10) For permits it
coordinates, the permit assistance center shall coordinate all
cost-reimbursement agreements executed under RCW 43.21A.690, 43.30.420,
43.70.630, 43.300.080, and 70.94.085.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
8. (1) There is established
the permit assistance advisory council composed of eleven members. Seven
members shall be appointed by the governor. In making these appointments, the
governor shall include representation from business, the environmental
community, agriculture, port districts, counties, cities, and the tribes. Two
members shall be members of the senate selected by the president of the senate
with one member selected from each caucus in the senate, and two members shall
be members of the house of representatives selected by the speaker of the house
of representatives with one member selected from each caucus in the house of
representatives. The legislative members shall be nonvoting members of the
council. Appointments to the council shall reflect geographical balance and
the diversity of population within Washington state. Members shall serve
four-year terms. Of the initial members appointed to the council, two shall
serve for two years, two shall serve for three years, and two shall serve for
four years. Thereafter members shall be appointed to four-year terms.
Vacancies shall be filled by appointment in the same manner as the original
appointment for the remainder of the unexpired term of the position being
vacated. Nonlegislative members shall be reimbursed for travel expenses as
provided in RCW 43.03.050 and 43.03.060. Legislative members shall be
reimbursed as provided in RCW 44.04.120.

(2) The council shall
elect a chair and a vice-chair from the voting members of the committee. The
chair and vice-chair shall serve a term of one year.

(3) The council shall:

(a) Assess the
performance of the center;

(b) Review annual
customer surveys conducted by the center to determine the effectiveness of the
center; and

(c) Recommend changes
to the services provided by the center to enhance technical assistance to
permit applicants.

(4) The council shall
meet at least four times per year.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
9. (1) The powers, duties,
and functions of the permit assistance center at the department of ecology are
transferred to the center created in section 3 of this act.

(2)(a) All reports,
documents, surveys, books, records, files, papers, or written material in the
possession of the department of ecology pertaining to the powers, functions,
and duties transferred shall be delivered to the custody of the center. All
cabinets, furniture, office equipment, motor vehicles, and other tangible
property employed by the department of ecology in carrying out the powers,
functions, and duties transferred shall be made available to the center. All
funds, credits, or other assets held in connection with the powers, functions,
and duties transferred shall be assigned to the center.

(b) Any appropriations
made to the department of ecology for carrying out the powers, functions, and
duties transferred shall, on June 30, 2002, be transferred and credited to the
center.

(c) Whenever any
question arises as to the transfer of any personnel, funds, books, documents,
records, papers, files, equipment, or other tangible property used or held in
the exercise of the powers and the performance of the duties and functions
transferred, the director of financial management shall make a determination as
to the proper allocation and certify the same to the state agencies concerned.

(3) All rules and all
pending business before the department of ecology pertaining to the powers,
functions, and duties transferred shall be continued and acted upon by the
center. All existing contracts and obligations shall remain in full force and
shall be performed by the center.

(4) The transfer of the
powers, duties, functions, and personnel of the authority shall not affect the
validity of any act performed before June 30, 2002.

(5) If apportionments
of budgeted funds are required because of the transfers directed by this
section, the director of financial management shall certify the apportionments
to the agencies affected, the state auditor, and the state treasurer. Each of
these shall make the appropriate transfer and adjustments in funds and
appropriation accounts and equipment records in accordance with the
certification.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
10. Nothing in this chapter
affects the jurisdiction of the energy facility site evaluation council as
provided in chapter 80.50 RCW.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
11. A new section is added
to chapter 43.131 RCW to read as follows:

The permit assistance
center and its powers and duties terminates June 30, 2007, as provided in
section 12 of this act.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
12. A new section is added
to chapter 43.131 RCW to read as follows:

The following acts or
parts of acts, as now existing or hereafter amended, are each repealed,
effective June 30, 2008:

(1) Section 1 of this
act;

(2) Section 2 of this
act;

(3) Section 3 of this
act;

(4) Section 4 of this
act;

(5) Section 5 of this
act;

(6) Section 6 of this
act;

(7) Section 7 of this
act;

(8) Section 8 of this
act;

(9) Section 9 of this
act; and

(10) Section 10 of this
act.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
13. Sections 1 through 10 of
this act constitute a new chapter in Title 90 RCW.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
14. If specific funding for
the purposes of this act, referencing this act by bill or chapter number, is
not provided by June 30, 2002, in the omnibus appropriations act, this act is
null and void.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 15. This act is necessary for
the immediate preservation of the public peace, health, or safety, or support
of the state government and its existing public institutions, and takes effect
immediately.

---
END ---