BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF
WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec.
1. A new section is added
to chapter 71.24 RCW to read as follows:

(1) A mental health
service provider or regional support network, acting in the course of the
provider's or network's duties, is not liable for civil damages resulting from
the injury or death of another caused by a dangerous mentally ill offender who
is a client of the provider or network, unless the act or omission of the
provider or network constitutes:

(a) Gross negligence;

(b) Willful or wanton
misconduct; or

(c) A breach of the
duty to warn of and protect from a client's threatened violent behavior if the
client has communicated a serious threat of physical violence against a
reasonably ascertainable victim or victims.

(2) In addition to any
other requirements to report violations, the mental health service provider and
regional support network shall report an offender's expressions of intent to
harm or other predatory behavior, regardless of whether there is an
ascertainable victim, in progress reports and other established processes that
enable courts and supervising entities to assess and address the progress and
appropriateness of treatment.

(3) A mental health
service provider's or regional support network's mere act of treating a
dangerous mentally ill offender is not negligence. Nothing in this subsection
alters the mental health service provider's or regional support network's
normal duty of care with regard to the client.

(4) The limited
liability provided by this section applies only to the conduct of mental health
service providers and regional support networks and does not apply to conduct
of the state.

(5) For
purposes of this section, "dangerous mentally ill offender" means a
person who has been identified under RCW 72.09.370 as an offender who: (a) Is
reasonably believed to be dangerous to himself or herself or others; and (b)
has a mental disorder.

--- END ---