BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF
WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1. RCW 28A.160.010 and 1990
c 33 s 132 are each amended to read as follows:

The operation of each
local school district's student transportation program is declared to be the
responsibility of the respective board of directors, and each board of
directors shall determine such matters as which individual students shall be
transported ((and)), what routes shall be most efficiently
utilized, and the safe display of flags on school buses and other school
vehicles. State moneys allocated to local districts for student
transportation shall be spent only for student transportation activities, but
need not be spent by the local district in the same manner as calculated and
allocated by the state.

A school district is
authorized to provide for the transportation of students enrolled in the school
or schools of the district both in the case of students who reside within the
boundaries of the district and of students who reside outside the boundaries of
the district.

When children are
transported from one school district to another the board of directors of the
respective districts may enter into a written contract providing for a division
of the cost of such transportation between the districts.

School districts may
use school buses and drivers hired by the district or commercial chartered bus
service for the transportation of school children and the school employees
necessary for their supervision to and from any school activities within or without
the school district during or after school hours and whether or not a required
school activity, so long as the school board has officially designated it as a
school activity. For any extra-curricular uses, the school board shall charge
an amount sufficient to reimburse the district for its cost.

In addition to the
right to contract for the use of buses provided in RCW 28A.160.080 and
28A.160.090, any school district may contract to furnish the use of school
buses of that district to other users who are engaged in conducting an
educational or recreational program supported wholly or in part by tax funds or
programs for elderly persons at times when those buses are not needed by that
district and under such terms as will fully reimburse such school district for
all costs related or incident thereto: PROVIDED, HOWEVER, That no such use of
school district buses shall be permitted except where other public or private
transportation certificated or licensed by the Washington utilities and
transportation commission is not reasonably available to the user: PROVIDED
FURTHER, That no user shall be required to accept any charter bus for services
which the user believes might place the health or safety of the children or
elderly persons in jeopardy.

Whenever any persons
are transported by the school district in its own motor vehicles and by its own
employees, the board may provide insurance to protect the district against
loss, whether by reason of theft, fire or property damage to the motor vehicle
or by reason of liability of the district to persons from the operation of such
motor vehicle.

The board may provide
insurance by contract purchase for payment of hospital and medical expenses for
the benefit of persons injured while they are on, getting on, or getting off
any vehicles enumerated herein without respect to any fault or liability on the
part of the school district or operator. This insurance may be provided
without cost to the persons notwithstanding the provisions of RCW 28A.400.350.

If the
transportation of children or elderly persons is arranged for by contract of
the district with some person, the board may require such contractor to procure
such insurance as the board deems advisable.

--- END ---