BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF
WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec.
1. It is the intent of the
state of Washington to protect the public against the health and safety risks
that dangerous wild animals pose to the community and to protect the welfare of
individual animals held in private possession. By their very nature, these
animals are wild and inherently dangerous and, as such, do not adjust well to a
captive environment.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
2. The definitions in this section
apply throughout this chapter unless the context clearly requires otherwise.

(1) "Animal
control authority" means an entity acting alone or in concert with other
local governmental units for enforcement of the animal control laws of the
city, county, and state, and the shelter and welfare of animals. "Animal
control authority" includes, but is not limited to the following
individuals: Animal control officers, local law enforcement agents, and county
sheriffs.

(2) "Animal
control officer" means an individual employed, contracted with, or
appointed by the animal control authority for the purpose of aiding in the
enforcement of this chapter or any law or ordinance relating to the licensure
of animals, control of animals, or seizure and impoundment of animals.
"Animal control officer" includes any state or local law enforcement
officer, or other employee whose duties in whole or in part include assignments
that involve the seizure and impoundment of any animal.

(3)
"Department" means the department of fish and wildlife.

(4) "Dangerous
wild animal" means those species of animals that are inherently dangerous
to humans. "Dangerous wild animals" include the following classes,
orders, and families, whether bred in the wild or in captivity:

(a) Class Mammalia:

(i) Order Carnivora:

(A) Family Felidae,
except domestic cats, and domestic cat and wildcat hybrids;

(B) Family Canidae,
only wolves, not wolf and dog hybrids;

(C) Family Ursidae; and

(ii) Order Primates,
only nonhuman primates; and

(b) Class Reptilia:

(i) Order Squamata:

(A) Family Colubridae,
only boomslangs, mangrove snakes, African twig snakes, and brown tree snakes;

(B) Family Elapidae;

(C) Family
Helodermatidae;

(D) Family Lacertilia,
only Salvator monitors and Salvadoran monitors; and

(E) Family Viperidae;
and

(ii) Order Crocodilia.

"Dangerous wild
animal" may include animals not listed if they are declared dangerous wild
animals by the department, and if the department finds that possession of the
animal within the state can be shown to constitute a threat to public health
and safety.

(5) "Person"
means any individual, partnership, corporation, organization, trade or
professional association, firm, limited liability company, joint venture,
association, trust, estate, or any other legal entity, and any officer, member,
shareholder, director, employee, agent, or representative thereof.

(6) "Wildlife
sanctuary" means a nonprofit organization described in section
170(b)(1)(A)(vi) of the internal revenue code of 1986, that operates a place of
refuge where abused, neglected, unwanted, impounded, abandoned, orphaned, or
displaced dangerous wild animals are provided care for their lifetime or
released back to their natural habitat and, with respect to any animal owned by
the organization, does not:

(a) Conduct any
activity that is not inherent to the animal's nature;

(b) Use the animal for
any type of entertainment, public display, or viewing;

(c) Sell, trade, or
barter the animal or the animal's body parts; or

(d) Breed the animal
for purposes of sale.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
3. (1) It is unlawful for
any person to own, possess, keep, harbor, bring, or have in one's possession a
dangerous wild animal, except in compliance with this chapter.

(2) It is unlawful for
the owner or any other person in control of a lot, tract, or parcel of land or
any residence or business premises situated thereon to knowingly permit any
other person to be in possession of a dangerous wild animal upon the property,
residence, or premises, except in compliance with this chapter.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
4. This chapter shall not
apply to:

(1) Institutions
accredited by the American zoo and aquarium association;

(2) Licensed humane
societies;

(3) Animal control
officers or law enforcement officers acting under the authority of this
chapter;

(4) Licensed veterinary
hospitals or clinics;

(5) Any wildlife
rehabilitator licensed by the state, under WAC 232-12-275;

(6) Any wildlife
sanctuary;

(7) Any licensed or
accredited research or medical institution;

(8) Any licensed or
accredited educational institution;

(9) Any circus, rodeo,
or trade show;

(10) A person
temporarily transporting a dangerous wild animal through the state if the
transit time is not more than ninety-six hours and the animal is at all times
maintained within a confinement sufficient to prevent the dangerous wild animal
from escaping; or

(11) Any state or
federal agency.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
5. (1) A person may possess
a dangerous wild animal if: The person was in legal possession of the
dangerous wild animal before the effective date of this act; the person is the
legal owner of the dangerous wild animal; and the person applies for and is granted
a personal possession permit for the dangerous wild animal in their possession
within ninety days after the effective date of this act. The permit is valid
in any local unit in which the possession of a dangerous wild animal is not
prohibited by local law. Persons who meet the requirements in this subsection
shall annually obtain a personal possession permit.

(2) After the effective
date of this act, no new dangerous wild animal shall be brought into possession
under authority of a personal possession permit.

(3) An applicant shall
file an application to receive a personal possession permit with the animal
control authority on a form provided by the animal control authority. The
application shall include the following:

(a) A nonrefundable
permit fee. The amount of the annual permit fee shall be established by the
animal control authority;

(b) A written statement
completed by the owner which sets forth the following information:

(i) The name, address,
and telephone number of the applicant;

(ii) A description of
each dangerous wild animal, including the scientific name, name, sex, age,
color, weight, and any distinguishing marks or coloration that would aid in
the identification of the animal;

(iii) A photograph of
the dangerous wild animal;

(iv) The exact location
where the dangerous wild animal is to be kept;

(v) The name, address,
and telephone number of the person from whom the applicant obtained the
dangerous wild animal, if known;

(vi) The identification
number of the dangerous wild animal, excluding reptiles when such device would
endanger the well-being of the reptile; and

(vii) The name,
address, and phone number of the veterinarian who is expected to provide
veterinary care to the dangerous wild animal;

(c) Any additional
information the animal control authority may deem necessary to carry out this
chapter.

(4) A permit shall not
be granted unless the animal control authority finds that all of the following
apply:

(a) The provisions
outlined under subsection (1) of this section are met;

(b) The applicant is
twenty-one years of age or older;

(c) The applicant has
not been convicted of, or found responsible for, violating a local or state law
prohibiting cruelty, neglect, or mistreatment of an animal or has not within
the past ten years been convicted of a felony or been convicted for possession,
sale, or use of illegal narcotics;

(d) The facility and
the conditions in which the dangerous wild animal will be kept are in
compliance with this chapter;

(e) The owner of the
dangerous wild animal has obtained the requisite liability insurance coverage
or surety bond for the dangerous wild animal under his or her control as set
forth in section 9 of this act; and

(f) The owner has
regularly provided veterinary care to the dangerous wild animal when needed and
intends to provide such care in the future.

(5) The personal
possession permit shall set forth all of the following information:

(a) The name, address,
and phone number of the permit holder;

(b) The address if
different than (a) of this subsection, where the dangerous wild animal will be
kept;

(c) The name, number,
species, and age of the dangerous wild animal, and any distinguishing marks or
coloration that would aid in the identification of the animal;

(d) The identification
number as required under section 6 of this act, if applicable;

(e) The name, address,
and phone number of the veterinarian who is expected to provide veterinary care
to the dangerous wild animal named on the permit; and

(f) Any other relevant
information the animal control authority may deem necessary.

(6) The animal control
authority shall keep records of who is carrying a valid permit. A permit
holder shall notify the animal control authority of any changes of the stated
information on the permit, which shall include the death of the dangerous wild
animal.

(7) Any city or county
that has a notice and appeal process in place as of the effective date of this
act with regard to determining an animal within its jurisdiction to be
dangerous may continue to use its process. A city or county animal control
authority that seeks to declare an animal within its jurisdiction to be
dangerous must serve notice upon the animal owner in person or by regular and
certified mail, return receipt requested.

(a) The notice must
state: The statutory basis for the proposed action; the reasons the authority
considers the animal dangerous; a statement that the animal is subject to
registration and controls required by this chapter; and an explanation of the
owner's rights and of the proper procedure for appealing a decision that finds
the animal dangerous.

(b) If the local
jurisdiction has provided for an administrative appeal of a final
determination, the owner must follow the appeal procedure set forth by that
jurisdiction. If the local jurisdiction has not provided for an administrative
appeal, the owner may appeal a municipal authority's final determination that
the animal is dangerous to the municipal court, and may appeal the animal
control authority's final determination that the animal is dangerous to the
district court. The owner must make such appeal within twenty days of
receiving the final determination. This subsection does not apply to animals
defined as dangerous wild animals, or that are declared to be dangerous wild
animals under section 2 of this act.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
6. The owner of the
dangerous wild animal shall have an identification number placed in the
dangerous wild animal via subcutaneous microchip, at the expense of the owner,
by or under the supervision of a veterinarian. This section applies only to
those species of dangerous wild animals that are also defined as wildlife under
RCW 77.08.010. An individual reptile may be exempt from this section if a
veterinarian determines that the placement of a subcutaneous microchip would
endanger the reptile.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
7. (1) The animal control
authority may establish specific caging requirements for the keeping and
confinement of dangerous wild animals. If the animal control authority
establishes caging requirements, the permittee shall keep and confine the
dangerous wild animal in strict accordance with the established caging
requirements. Any deviations from the regulations established by the animal
control authority shall be approved by the animal control authority upon a
showing of good cause.

(2) All caging
requirements established by the animal control authority shall ensure that the
dangerous wild animal is confined in a primary enclosure that protects the
public's safety and health and ensures the safety and well-being of the
dangerous wild animal.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
8. (1) A dangerous wild
animal shall not be tethered, leashed, or chained outdoors, or allowed to run
at large.

(2) A dangerous wild
animal shall not be mistreated, neglected, abandoned, or deprived of necessary
food, water, and sustenance.

(3) A permittee
transporting a dangerous wild animal in a vehicle shall ensure that the
dangerous wild animal is individually and securely caged, even while inside a
passenger vehicle or in the bed of a truck.

(4) Each permittee
shall have a plan for the quick and safe recapture of the dangerous wild animal
if the dangerous wild animal escapes, if recapture is impossible, then a plan
for the destruction of the dangerous wild animal held under a personal
possession permit.

(5) If an owner
realizes that he or she can no longer care for the dangerous wild animal, an
animal rescue facility, wildlife sanctuary, or an American zoo and aquarium
association accredited facility shall be contacted for possible placement of
the animal before euthanization of the dangerous wild animal. The owner shall
be liable for all costs associated with the placement or euthanization of the
dangerous wild animal.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
9. (1) All owners of a
dangerous wild animal shall either: (a) Maintain liability insurance coverage
with an insurer qualified under Title 48 RCW in the amount of at least two
hundred fifty thousand dollars insuring for bodily injury to or death of a
person or injury and destruction to property caused by the dangerous wild
animal; or (b) must guarantee that the owner has a surety bond issued by a
surety insurer qualified under chapter 48.28 RCW in a form acceptable to the
animal control authority in the amount of at least two hundred fifty thousand
dollars. All owners of a dangerous wild animal shall provide a copy of the
policy for liability insurance or proof of surety bond to the animal control
authority on a yearly basis.

(2) All owners of a
dangerous wild animal shall have posted and displayed at each possible entrance
onto the premises where a dangerous wild animal is kept a conspicuous sign,
clearly legible, and easily readable by the public warning that there is a
dangerous wild animal on the premises. In addition, the owner shall
conspicuously display a sign with a warning symbol that informs children of the
presence of a dangerous wild animal.

(3) If any dangerous
wild animal escapes or is released, either intentionally or unintentionally,
the owner of the dangerous wild animal shall immediately contact a law
enforcement officer of the city or county where the owner resides to report the
escape or release. The owner is liable for all expenses associated with
efforts to recapture the animal. If it is determined that the owner was not at
fault for the escape or release of the dangerous wild animal, and the person
who is responsible for the escape or release is known, the owner may bring a
civil action suit for damages against the person.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
10. The permittee shall not
bring a dangerous wild animal to any commercial or retail establishment unless
the permittee is bringing the animal to a veterinarian or a veterinary clinic.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
11. An owner of a dangerous
wild animal, at all reasonable times, shall allow an animal control officer to
enter the premises where the animal is kept to ensure compliance with this
chapter.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
12. (1) Any dangerous wild
animal shall be immediately confiscated by an animal control authority if the:
(a) Owner does not have a personal possession permit under section 5 of this
act; (b) owner does not secure the liability insurance coverage or surety bond
required under section 9 of this act; (c) provisions of section 8 of this act
are not being met; (d) conditions under which the dangerous wild animal is kept
are directly or indirectly dangerous to human health and safety. In addition,
the owner is guilty of a gross misdemeanor punishable in accordance with RCW
9A.20.021.

(2) A dangerous wild
animal may be returned to the owner only if the owner has a personal possession
permit and has corrected the conditions resulting in the confiscation.

(3) If a dangerous wild
animal is confiscated, the owner is liable for the costs of euthanization or
placement and care for the dangerous wild animal from the time of confiscation
until the time of return to the owner or until the time the animal has been
relocated to an alternative facility, such as a sanctuary, licensed humane
society, or an institution accredited by the American zoo and aquarium
association.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 13. Sections 1 through 12 of
this act constitute a new chapter in Title 16 RCW.

---
END ---