BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF
WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1. RCW 36.70A.130 and 1997
c 429 s 10 are each amended to read as follows:

(1)(a) Each
comprehensive land use plan and development regulations shall be subject to
continuing review and evaluation by the county or city that adopted them. ((Not
later than September 1, 2002, and at least every five years thereafter,)) A
county or city shall take action to review and, if needed, revise its
comprehensive land use plan and development regulations to ensure ((that))
the plan and regulations ((are complying)) comply with the
requirements of this chapter according to the time periods specified in
subsection (4) of this section. A county or city not planning under RCW
36.70A.040 shall, using best available science, take action to review and, if
needed, revise its policies and development regulations regarding critical
areas and natural resource lands adopted according to this chapter to ensure
these policies and regulations comply with the requirements of this chapter
according to the time periods specified in subsection (4) of this section.
The review and evaluation required by this subsection may be combined with the
review required by subsection (3) of this section.

(b) Any
amendment of or revision to a comprehensive land use plan shall use
best available science and conform to this chapter((, and any change)).
Any amendment of or revision to development regulations shall be consistent
with and implement the comprehensive plan.

(2)(a) Each county and
city shall establish and broadly disseminate to the public a public
participation program identifying procedures whereby proposed amendments or
revisions of the comprehensive plan are considered by the governing body of the
county or city no more frequently than once every year ((except that)).
Amendments may be considered more frequently than once per year
under the following circumstances:

(i) The initial
adoption of a subarea plan;

(ii) The adoption or
amendment of a shoreline master program under the procedures set forth in
chapter 90.58 RCW; and

(iii) The amendment of
the capital facilities element of a comprehensive plan that occurs concurrently
with the adoption or amendment of a county or city budget.

(b) Except as otherwise
provided in (a) of this subsection, all proposals shall be considered by the
governing body concurrently so the cumulative effect of the various proposals
can be ascertained. However, after appropriate public participation a county
or city may adopt amendments or revisions to its comprehensive plan that
conform with this chapter whenever an emergency exists or to resolve an appeal
of a comprehensive plan filed with a growth management hearings board or with
the court.

(3) Each county that
designates urban growth areas under RCW 36.70A.110 shall review, at least every
ten years, its designated urban growth area or areas, and the densities
permitted within both the incorporated and unincorporated portions of each
urban growth area. In conjunction with this review by the county, each city
located within an urban growth area shall review the densities permitted within
its boundaries, and the extent to which the urban growth occurring within the
county has located within each city and the unincorporated portions of the
urban growth areas. The county comprehensive plan designating urban growth
areas, and the densities permitted in the urban growth areas by the comprehensive
plans of the county and each city located within the urban growth areas, shall
be revised to accommodate the urban growth projected to occur in the county for
the succeeding twenty-year period. The review required by this subsection may
be combined with the review and evaluation required by RCW 36.70A.215.

(4) The department
shall establish a schedule for counties and cities to conduct the review and
evaluation required by subsection (1) of this section. The schedule
established by the department shall provide for the reviews and evaluations to
be completed as follows:

(a) On or before
July 1, 2004, and every five years thereafter, for Clark, King, Kitsap, Pierce,
Snohomish, and Thurston counties and the cities within those counties;

(b) On or before
December 1, 2004, and every ten years thereafter, for Clallam, Jefferson, and
Whatcom counties and the cities within those counties;

(c) On or before
December 1, 2005, and every ten years thereafter, for Cowlitz, Island, Lewis,
Mason, San Juan, Skagit, and Skamania counties and the cities within those
counties;

(d) On or before
December 1, 2006, and every ten years thereafter, for Benton, Chelan, Douglas,
Grant, Kittitas, Spokane, and Yakima counties and the cities within those
counties; and

(e) On or before
December 1, 2007, and every ten years thereafter, for Adams, Asotin, Columbia,
Ferry, Franklin, Garfield, Grays Harbor, Klickitat, Lincoln, Okanogan, Pacific,
Pend Oreille, Stevens, Wahkiakum, Walla Walla, and Whitman counties and the
cities within those counties.

(5) Nothing in this
section precludes a county or city from conducting the review and evaluation
required by this section before the time limits established in subsection (4)
of this section. Counties and cities may begin this process early and may be
eligible for grants from the department, subject to available funding, if they
elect to do so.

(6) A county or city
subject to the time periods in subsection (4)(a) of this section that, pursuant
to an ordinance adopted by the county or city establishing a schedule for
periodic review of its comprehensive plan and development regulations, has
conducted a review and evaluation of its comprehensive plan and development
regulations and, on or after January 1, 2001, has taken action in response to
that review and evaluation shall be deemed to have conducted the first review
required by subsection (4)(a) of this section. Subsequent review and
evaluation by the county or city of its comprehensive plan and development
regulations shall be conducted in accordance with the time periods established
under subsection (4)(a) of this section.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
2. A new section is added
to chapter 82.36 RCW to read as follows:

The state treasurer
shall withhold a portion of the revenues to which a county or city, that is
subject to RCW 36.70A.130(4)(a), is entitled under this chapter if the
requirements of RCW 36.70A.130(1) are not completed by the date established in
RCW 36.70A.130(4)(a).

NEW SECTION. Sec.
3. A new section is added
to chapter 82.14 RCW to read as follows:

The state treasurer
shall withhold a portion of the revenues to which a county or city, that is
subject to RCW 36.70A.130(4)(a), is entitled under this chapter if the
requirements of RCW 36.70A.130(1) are not completed by the date established in
RCW 36.70A.130(4)(a).

Sec. 4. RCW 47.26.084 and 1999 c
94 s 17 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) The
transportation improvement account is hereby created in the motor vehicle
fund. The intent of the program is to improve mobility of people and goods in
Washington state by supporting economic development and environmentally
responsive solutions to our statewide transportation system needs.

Within one year after
board approval of an application for funding, a county, city, or transportation
benefit district shall provide written certification to the board of the
pledged local and/or private funding. Funds allocated to an applicant that
does not certify its funding within one year after approval may be reallocated
by the board.

(2) The state
treasurer shall withhold a portion of the revenues to which a county or city,
that is subject to RCW 36.70A.130(4)(a), is entitled under this section if the
requirements of RCW 36.70A.130(1) are not completed by the date established in
RCW 36.70A.130(4)(a).

Sec. 5. RCW 36.79.150 and 1991
sp.s. c 32 s 31 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) Whenever the board
approves a rural arterial project it shall determine the amount of rural
arterial trust account funds to be allocated for such project. The allocation
shall be based upon information contained in the six-year plan submitted by the
county seeking approval of the project and upon such further investigation as
the board deems necessary. The board shall adopt reasonable rules pursuant to
which rural arterial trust account funds allocated to a project may be
increased upon a subsequent application of the county constructing the
project. The rules adopted by the board shall take into account, but shall not
be limited to, the following factors: (a) The financial effect of increasing
the original allocation for the project upon other rural arterial projects
either approved or requested; (b) whether the project for which an additional
allocation is requested can be reduced in scope while retaining a usable
segment; (c) whether the original cost of the project shown in the applicant's
six-year program was based upon reasonable engineering estimates; and (d)
whether the requested additional allocation is to pay for an expansion in the
scope of work originally approved.

(2) The board shall not
allocate funds, nor make payments under RCW 36.79.160, to any county or city
identified by the governor under RCW 36.70A.340.

(3) The
state treasurer shall withhold a portion of the revenues to which a county or
city, that is subject to RCW 36.70A.130(4)(a), is entitled under this section
if the requirements of RCW 36.70A.130(1) are not completed by the date
established in RCW 36.70A.130(4)(a).

Sec. 6. RCW 66.08.190 and 2000 c
227 s 2 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) When excess funds
are distributed, all moneys subject to distribution shall be disbursed as
follows:

(a) Three-tenths of one
percent to border areas under RCW 66.08.195; and

(b) From the amount
remaining after distribution under (a) of this subsection, fifty percent to the
general fund of the state, ten percent to the counties of the state, and forty
percent to the incorporated cities and towns of the state.

(2) During the months
of July, October, January, and April of each year, prior to disbursing the
distribution to incorporated cities and towns under subsection (1)(b) of this
section, the treasurer shall deduct from that distribution an amount that, when
combined with any cash balance in the city and town research services account,
will fund that quarter's allotments under RCW 43.88.110 from any legislative
appropriation from the city and town research services account. The treasurer
shall deposit the amount deducted into the city and town research services
account.

(3) The governor may
notify and direct the state treasurer to withhold the revenues to which the
counties and cities are entitled under this section if the counties or cities
are found to be in noncompliance pursuant to RCW 36.70A.340.

(4) The state
treasurer shall withhold a portion of the revenues to which a county or city,
that is subject to RCW 36.70A.130(4)(a), is entitled under this section if the
requirements of RCW 36.70A.130(1) are not completed by the date established in
RCW 36.70A.130(4)(a).

Sec. 7. RCW 82.08.170 and 1997 c
437 s 4 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) During the months
of January, April, July and October of each year, the state treasurer shall
make the apportionment and distribution of all moneys in the liquor excise tax
fund to the counties, cities and towns in the following proportions: Twenty
percent of the moneys in said liquor excise tax fund shall be divided among and
distributed to the counties of the state in accordance with the provisions of
RCW 66.08.200; eighty percent of the moneys in said liquor excise tax fund
shall be divided among and distributed to the cities and towns of the state in
accordance with the provisions of RCW 66.08.210.

(2) Each fiscal quarter
and prior to making the twenty percent distribution to counties under
subsection (1) of this section, the treasurer shall transfer to the county
research services account under RCW 43.110.050 sufficient moneys that, when
combined with any cash balance in the account, will fund the allotments from
any legislative appropriations from the county research services account.

(3) The
state treasurer shall withhold a portion of the revenues to which a county or
city, that is subject to RCW 36.70A.130(4)(a), is entitled under this chapter
if the requirements of RCW 36.70A.130(1) are not completed by the date
established in RCW 36.70A.130(4)(a).

---
END ---