BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF
WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1. RCW 53.36.020 and 1973
1st ex.s. c 195 s 56 are each amended to read as follows:

A district, other
than a countywide district in a county with a population of more than one
million, may raise revenue by levy of an annual tax not to exceed
forty-five cents per thousand dollars of assessed value against the assessed
valuation of the taxable property in such port district for general port
purposes, including the establishment of a capital improvement fund for future
capital improvements, except that any levy for the payment of the principal and
interest of the general bonded indebtedness of the port district shall be in
excess of any levy made by the port district under the forty-five cents per
thousand dollars of assessed value limitation. The levy shall be made and
taxes collected in the manner provided for the levy and collection of taxes in
school districts of the first class.

Sec. 2. RCW 53.36.070 and 1983 c
3 s 162 are each amended to read as follows:

Any port district,
other than a countywide district in a county with a population of more than one
million, organized under the laws of this state shall, in addition to the
powers otherwise provided by law, have the power to raise revenue by the levy
and collection of an annual tax on all taxable property within such port
district of not to exceed forty-five cents per thousand dollars of assessed
value against the assessed valuation of the taxable property in such port
district, for dredging, canal construction, or land leveling or filling
purposes, the proceeds of any such levy to be used exclusively for such
dredging, canal construction, or land leveling and filling purposes: PROVIDED,
That no such levy for dredging, canal construction, or land leveling or filling
purposes under the provisions of RCW 53.36.070 and 53.36.080 shall be made
unless and until the question of authorizing the making of such additional levy
shall have been submitted to a vote of the electors of the district in the
manner provided by law for the submission of the question of making additional
levies in school districts of the first class at an election held under the
provisions of RCW 29.13.020 and shall have been authorized by a majority of the
electors voting thereon.

Sec. 3. RCW 53.36.100 and 1994 c
278 s 1 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) A port district,
other than a countywide district in a county with a population of more than one
million, having adopted a comprehensive scheme of harbor improvements and industrial
developments may thereafter raise revenue, for six years only, and a second six
years if the procedures are followed under subsection (2) of this section, in
addition to all other revenues now authorized by law, by an annual levy not to
exceed forty-five cents per thousand dollars of assessed value against the
assessed valuation of the taxable property in such port district. In addition,
if voters approve a ballot proposition authorizing additional levies by a
simple majority vote, a port district located in a county bordering on the
Pacific Ocean having adopted a comprehensive scheme of harbor improvements and
industrial developments may impose these levies for a third six-year period.
Said levies shall be used exclusively for the exercise of the powers granted to
port districts under chapter 53.25 RCW except as provided in RCW 53.36.110.
The levy of such taxes is herein authorized notwithstanding the provisions of
RCW 84.52.050 and 84.52.043. The revenues derived from levies made under RCW 53.36.100
and 53.36.110 not expended in the year in which the levies are made may be paid
into a fund for future use in carrying out the powers granted under chapter
53.25 RCW, which fund may be accumulated and carried over from year to year,
with the right to continue to levy the taxes provided for in RCW 53.36.100 and
53.36.110 for the purposes herein authorized.

(2) If a port district
intends to levy a tax under this section for one or more years after the first
six years these levies were imposed, the port commission shall publish notice
of this intention, in one or more newspapers of general circulation within the
district, by June 1 of the year in which the first levy of the seventh through
twelfth year period is to be made. If within ninety days of the date of
publication a petition is filed with the county auditor containing the
signatures of eight percent of the number of voters registered and voting in
the port district for the office of the governor at the last preceding
gubernatorial election, the county auditor shall canvass the signatures in the
same manner as prescribed in RCW 29.79.200 and certify their sufficiency to the
port commission within two weeks. The proposition to make these levies in the
seventh through twelfth year period shall be submitted to the voters of the
port district at a special election, called for this purpose, no later than the
date on which a primary election would be held under RCW 29.13.070. The levies
may be made in the seventh through twelfth year period only if approved by a
majority of the voters of the port district voting on the proposition.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 4. This act applies to taxes
levied for collection in 2003 and thereafter.

---
END ---