BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF
WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1. RCW 29.07.025 and 1994 c
57 s 10 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) Each state agency
designated under RCW 29.07.420 shall provide voter registration services for
employees and the public within each office of that agency.

(2) The secretary of
state shall design and provide a standard notice informing the public of the
availability of voter registration, which notice shall be posted in each state
agency where such services are available.

(3) The secretary of
state shall design and provide standard voter registration forms for use by
these state agencies.

(4)
Each institution of higher education shall put in place an active prompt on its
course registration web site, or similar web site that students actively and
regularly use, that, if selected, will link the student to the secretary of
state's voter registration web site. The prompt must ask the student if he or
she wishes to register to vote.

--- END ---