BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF
WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec.
1. A new section is added
to chapter 48.43 RCW to read as follows:

If a health carrier
provides a health benefit plan to any employer or individual, the health
carrier may not be required to provide the employer or individual contraception
coverage, services, or benefits.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 2. This act is necessary for
the immediate preservation of the public peace, health, morals, and safety, or
support of the state government and its existing public institutions, and takes
effect immediately.

---
END ---