BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF
WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1. RCW 42.17.130 and 1979 ex.s.
c 265 s 2 are each amended to read as follows:

No elective official
nor any employee of his or her office nor any person appointed to or
employed by any public office or agency may use or authorize the use of any of
the facilities of a public office or agency, directly or indirectly, for the
purpose of assisting a campaign for election of any person to any office or for
the promotion of or opposition to any ballot proposition. Facilities of public
office or agency include, but are not limited to, use of stationery, postage,
machines, and equipment, use of employees of the office or agency during
working hours, vehicles, office space, publications of the office or agency,
and clientele lists of persons served by the office or agency: PROVIDED, That
the foregoing provisions of this section shall not apply to the following
activities:

(1) Action taken at an
open public meeting by members of an elected legislative body to express a
collective decision, or to actually vote upon a motion, proposal, resolution,
order, or ordinance, or to support or oppose a ballot proposition so long as
(a) any required notice of the meeting includes the title and number of the
ballot proposition, and (b) members of the legislative body or members of the
public are afforded an approximately equal opportunity for the expression of an
opposing view;

(2) A statement by an
elected official in support of or in opposition to any ballot proposition at an
open press conference or in response to a specific inquiry;

(3) Activities ((which))
that are part of the normal and regular conduct of the office or agency;

(4) Use of public
facilities by elected officials for the preparation or delivery of written or
verbal communications initiated by them consisting of information on the impact
of any ballot propositions that foreseeably may affect a matter that falls
within their constitutional or statutory responsibilities.

Sec. 2. RCW 42.52.180 and 1995 c
397 s 30 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) No state officer or
state employee may use or authorize the use of facilities of an agency,
directly or indirectly, for the purpose of assisting a campaign for election of
a person to an office or for the promotion of or opposition to a ballot
proposition. Knowing acquiescence by a person with authority to direct,
control, or influence the actions of the state officer or state employee using
public resources in violation of this section constitutes a violation of this
section. Facilities of an agency include, but are not limited to, use of
stationery, postage, machines, and equipment, use of state employees of the
agency during working hours, vehicles, office space, publications of the
agency, and clientele lists of persons served by the agency.

(2) This section shall
not apply to the following activities:

(a) Action taken at an
open public meeting by members of an elected legislative body to express a
collective decision, or to actually vote upon a motion, proposal, resolution,
order, or ordinance, or to support or oppose a ballot proposition as long as
(i) required notice of the meeting includes the title and number of the ballot
proposition, and (ii) members of the legislative body or members of the public
are afforded an approximately equal opportunity for the expression of an
opposing view;

(b) Use of public
facilities by state officers for the preparation or delivery of written or
verbal communications initiated by them consisting of information on the impact
of any ballot propositions that foreseeably may affect a matter that falls
within their constitutional or statutory responsibilities;

(c) A statement
by an elected official in support of or in opposition to any ballot proposition
at an open press conference or in response to a specific inquiry. For the
purposes of this subsection, it is not a violation of this section for an
elected official to respond to an inquiry regarding a ballot proposition, to
make incidental remarks concerning a ballot proposition in an official
communication, or otherwise comment on a ballot proposition without an actual,
measurable expenditure of public funds. The ethics boards shall adopt by rule
a definition of measurable expenditure;

(((c))) (d)
Activities that are part of the normal and regular conduct of the office or
agency; and

(((d))) (e)
De minimis use of public facilities by statewide elected officials and
legislators incidental to the preparation or delivery of permissible
communications((, including written and verbal communications initiated by
them of their views on ballot propositions that foreseeably may affect a matter
that falls within their constitutional or statutory responsibilities)).

(3) As to
state officers and employees, this section operates to the exclusion of RCW
42.17.130.

---
END ---