BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF
WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1. RCW 41.06.150 and 1999 c
297 s 3 are each amended to read as follows:

The board shall adopt
rules, consistent with the purposes and provisions of this chapter, as now or
hereafter amended, and with the best standards of personnel administration,
regarding the basis and procedures to be followed for:

(1) The reduction,
dismissal, suspension, or demotion of an employee;

(2) Certification of
names for vacancies, including departmental promotions, with the number of names
equal to six more names than there are vacancies to be filled, such names
representing applicants rated highest on eligibility lists: PROVIDED, That
when other applicants have scores equal to the lowest score among the names
certified, their names shall also be certified;

(3) Examinations for
all positions in the competitive and noncompetitive service;

(4) Appointments;

(5) Training and career
development;

(6) Probationary
periods of six to twelve months and rejections of probationary employees, depending
on the job requirements of the class, except ((that entry level state park
rangers shall serve a probationary period of twelve months)) as follows:

(a) Entry level
state park rangers shall serve a probationary period of twelve months;

(b) The probationary
period of campus police officer appointees who are required to attend the
Washington state criminal justice training commission basic law enforcement
academy shall extend from the date of appointment until twelve months from the
date of successful completion of the basic law enforcement academy, or twelve
months from the date of appointment if academy training is not required. The
board shall adopt rules to ensure that employees promoting to campus police
officer who are required to attend the Washington state criminal justice
training commission basic law enforcement academy shall have the trial service
period extend from the date of appointment until twelve months from the date of
successful completion of the basic law enforcement academy, or twelve months
from the date of appointment if academy training is not required;

(7) Transfers;

(8) Sick leaves and
vacations;

(9) Hours of work;

(10) Layoffs when
necessary and subsequent reemployment, both according to seniority;

(11) Determination of
appropriate bargaining units within any agency: PROVIDED, That in making such
determination the board shall consider the duties, skills, and working
conditions of the employees, the history of collective bargaining by the
employees and their bargaining representatives, the extent of organization
among the employees, and the desires of the employees;

(12) Certification and
decertification of exclusive bargaining representatives: PROVIDED, That after
certification of an exclusive bargaining representative and upon the
representative's request, the director shall hold an election among employees
in a bargaining unit to determine by a majority whether to require as a
condition of employment membership in the certified exclusive bargaining
representative on or after the thirtieth day following the beginning of
employment or the date of such election, whichever is the later, and the
failure of an employee to comply with such a condition of employment
constitutes cause for dismissal: PROVIDED FURTHER, That no more often than
once in each twelve-month period after expiration of twelve months following
the date of the original election in a bargaining unit and upon petition of
thirty percent of the members of a bargaining unit the director shall hold an
election to determine whether a majority wish to rescind such condition of
employment: PROVIDED FURTHER, That for purposes of this clause, membership in
the certified exclusive bargaining representative is satisfied by the payment
of monthly or other periodic dues and does not require payment of initiation,
reinstatement, or any other fees or fines and includes full and complete
membership rights: AND PROVIDED FURTHER, That in order to safeguard the right
of nonassociation of public employees, based on bona fide religious tenets or
teachings of a church or religious body of which such public employee is a
member, such public employee shall pay to the union, for purposes within the
program of the union as designated by such employee that would be in harmony
with his or her individual conscience, an amount of money equivalent to regular
union dues minus any included monthly premiums for union-sponsored insurance
programs, and such employee shall not be a member of the union but is entitled
to all the representation rights of a union member;

(13) Agreements between
agencies and certified exclusive bargaining representatives providing for
grievance procedures and collective negotiations on all personnel matters over
which the appointing authority of the appropriate bargaining unit of such
agency may lawfully exercise discretion;

(14) Written agreements
may contain provisions for payroll deductions of employee organization dues
upon authorization by the employee member and for the cancellation of such
payroll deduction by the filing of a proper prior notice by the employee with
the appointing authority and the employee organization: PROVIDED, That nothing
contained herein permits or grants to any employee the right to strike or
refuse to perform his or her official duties;

(15) Adoption and
revision of a comprehensive classification plan for all positions in the
classified service, based on investigation and analysis of the duties and
responsibilities of each such position.

(a) The board shall not
adopt job classification revisions or class studies unless implementation of
the proposed revision or study will result in net cost savings, increased
efficiencies, or improved management of personnel or services, and the proposed
revision or study has been approved by the director of financial management in
accordance with chapter 43.88 RCW.

(b) Beginning July 1,
1995, through June 30, 1997, in addition to the requirements of (a) of this
subsection:

(i) The board may
approve the implementation of salary increases resulting from adjustments to
the classification plan during the 1995-97 fiscal biennium only if:

(A) The implementation
will not result in additional net costs and the proposed implementation has
been approved by the director of financial management in accordance with
chapter 43.88 RCW;

(B) The implementation
will take effect on July 1, 1996, and the total net cost of all such actions
approved by the board for implementation during the 1995-97 fiscal biennium
does not exceed the amounts specified by the legislature specifically for this
purpose; or

(C) The implementation
is a result of emergent conditions. Emergent conditions are defined as
emergency situations requiring the establishment of positions necessary for the
preservation of the public health, safety, or general welfare, which do not
exceed $250,000 of the moneys identified in section 718(2), chapter 18, Laws of
1995 2nd sp. sess.

(ii) The board shall
approve only those salary increases resulting from adjustments to the
classification plan if they are due to documented recruitment and retention
difficulties, salary compression or inversion, increased duties and
responsibilities, or inequities. For these purposes, inequities are defined as
similar work assigned to different job classes with a salary disparity greater
than 7.5 percent.

(iii) Adjustments made
to the higher education hospital special pay plan are exempt from (b)(i)
through (ii) of this subsection.

(c) Reclassifications,
class studies, and salary adjustments to be implemented during the 1997-99 and
subsequent fiscal biennia are governed by (a) of this subsection and RCW
41.06.152;

(16) Allocation and
reallocation of positions within the classification plan;

(17) Adoption and
revision of a state salary schedule to reflect the prevailing rates in
Washington state private industries and other governmental units but the rates
in the salary schedules or plans shall be increased if necessary to attain
comparable worth under an implementation plan under RCW 41.06.155 and that, for
institutions of higher education and related boards, shall be competitive for
positions of a similar nature in the state or the locality in which an
institution of higher education or related board is located, such adoption and
revision subject to approval by the director of financial management in
accordance with the provisions of chapter 43.88 RCW;

(18) Increment
increases within the series of steps for each pay grade based on length of
service for all employees whose standards of performance are such as to permit
them to retain job status in the classified service;

(19) Optional lump sum
relocation compensation approved by the agency director, whenever it is
reasonably necessary that a person make a domiciliary move in accepting a
transfer or other employment with the state. An agency must provide lump sum
compensation within existing resources. If the person receiving the relocation
payment terminates or causes termination with the state, for reasons other than
layoff, disability separation, or other good cause as determined by an agency
director, within one year of the date of the employment, the state is entitled
to reimbursement of the lump sum compensation from the person;

(20) Providing for
veteran's preference as required by existing statutes, with recognition of
preference in regard to layoffs and subsequent reemployment for veterans and
their surviving spouses by giving such eligible veterans and their surviving
spouses additional credit in computing their seniority by adding to their unbroken
state service, as defined by the board, the veteran's service in the military
not to exceed five years. For the purposes of this section,
"veteran" means any person who has one or more years of active
military service in any branch of the armed forces of the United States or who
has less than one year's service and is discharged with a disability incurred
in the line of duty or is discharged at the convenience of the government and
who, upon termination of such service has received an honorable discharge, a
discharge for physical reasons with an honorable record, or a release from
active military service with evidence of service other than that for which an
undesirable, bad conduct, or dishonorable discharge shall be given: PROVIDED,
HOWEVER, That the surviving spouse of a veteran is entitled to the benefits of
this section regardless of the veteran's length of active military service:
PROVIDED FURTHER, That for the purposes of this section "veteran"
does not include any person who has voluntarily retired with twenty or more
years of active military service and whose military retirement pay is in excess
of five hundred dollars per month;

(21) Permitting agency
heads to delegate the authority to appoint, reduce, dismiss, suspend, or demote
employees within their agencies if such agency heads do not have specific
statutory authority to so delegate: PROVIDED, That the board may not authorize
such delegation to any position lower than the head of a major subdivision of
the agency;

(22) Assuring persons
who are or have been employed in classified positions before July 1, 1993, will
be eligible for employment, reemployment, transfer, and promotion in respect to
classified positions covered by this chapter;

(23) Affirmative action
in appointment, promotion, transfer, recruitment, training, and career
development; development and implementation of affirmative action goals and
timetables; and monitoring of progress against those goals and timetables.

The board
shall consult with the human rights commission in the development of rules
pertaining to affirmative action. The department of personnel shall transmit a
report annually to the human rights commission which states the progress each
state agency has made in meeting affirmative action goals and timetables.

--- END ---