BE IT ENACTED
BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1. The definitions in this
section apply throughout this chapter unless the context clearly requires
otherwise.

(1) "Automotive mercury switch" includes a convenience
switch, such as a switch for a trunk or hood light, and a mercury switch in
antilock brake systems.

(2) "Dental amalgam" means a mixture of mercury, and an
alloy of silver, tin, and copper, used in dentistry.

(3) "Department" means the department of ecology.

(4) "Director" means the director of the department of
ecology.

(5) "Health care facility" means a hospital, nursing
home, extended care facility, long-term care facility, clinical or medical
laboratory, state or private health or mental institution, clinic, physician's
office, or health maintenance organization.

(6) "Manufacturer" means any person, firm, association,
partnership, corporation, governmental entity, organization, or joint venture
that produces a mercury-added product or an importer or domestic distributor of
a mercury-added product produced in a foreign country. In the case of a
multicomponent product containing mercury, the manufacturer is the last
manufacturer to produce or assemble the product. If the multicomponent product
or mercury-added product is produced in a foreign country, the manufacturer is
the importer or domestic distributor.

(7) "Mercury manometer" means a mercury-added product
that is used for measuring blood pressure.

(8) "Mercury thermometer" means a mercury-added product
that is used for measuring temperature.

(9) "Mercury-added button cell battery" means a button
cell battery to which the manufacturer intentionally introduces mercury for the
operation of the battery.

(10) "Mercury-added novelty" means a mercury-added
product intended mainly for personal or household enjoyment or adornment.
Mercury-added novelties include, but are not limited to, items intended for use
as practical jokes, figurines, adornments, toys, games, cards, ornaments, yard
statues and figures, candles, jewelry, holiday decorations, items of apparel,
and other similar products.

(11) "Mercury-added product" means a product, commodity,
or chemical, or a product with a component that contains mercury or a mercury
compound intentionally added to the product, commodity, or chemical in order to
provide a specific characteristic, appearance, or quality, or to perform a
specific function, or for any other reason. Mercury‑added products
include, but are not limited to, mercury thermometers, mercury thermostats, and
mercury switches in motor vehicles.

(12) "Retailer" means a retailer of a mercury-added
product.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2. Nothing in this chapter
applies to prescription drugs regulated by the food and drug administration
under the federal food, drug, and cosmetic act (21 U.S.C. Sec. 301 et seq.), to
biological products regulated by the food and drug administration under the
public health service act (42 U.S.C. Sec. 262 et seq.), to any substance that
may be lawfully sold over-the-counter without a prescription under the federal
food, drug, and cosmetic act (21 U.S.C. Sec. 301 et seq.), or to dental
amalgam.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3. (1) No later than one
year after the effective date of this section, every manufacturer of
thermometers and commercial or residential, but not industrial, thermostats
that contain mercury and that have been or may be offered for sale or
distributed for sale or use in this state must ensure that these products are
properly collected, transported, and recycled by doing one of the following:

(a) Establishing and funding, directly or with the help of a third
party, a collection system through which the used products can be returned for
recycling or disposed of as hazardous waste; or

(b) Identifying and funding existing collection systems through which
the used products can be returned for recycling or disposed of as hazardous
waste.

(2) Every manufacturer of mercury thermometers and commercial or
residential thermostats containing mercury is financially responsible for the
collection and recycling systems established under subsection (1) of this
section. All collection and recycling must be conducted in a manner that
prevents the release of mercury into the environment. All collection and
recycling systems are subject to department approval.

(3) The collection system plan must include:

(a) A public education program to inform the public about the
purpose of the collection program and how to participate in it;

(b) A targeted capture rate for products;

(c) A plan for implementing and financing the collection system;

(d) Documentation of the willingness of all necessary parties to
implement the proposed collection system;

(e) A description of performance measures to be utilized and
reported by the manufacturer of thermometers and commercial or residential
thermostats to demonstrate that the collection system is meeting rate targets
and other measures of program effectiveness as required by the department; and

(f) A description of additional or alternative actions that will be
implemented to improve the collection system and its operation in the event
that the program targets are not met.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 4. (1) No mercury-added
product manufactured after the effective date of this section may be sold,
offered for final sale, or distributed for sale or use in the state unless both
the product and its packaging are labeled in accordance with this section and
any adopted rules. This requirement may be met by compliance with the terms of
any approved alternative labeling or notification granted under subsection (7)
of this section. A retailer may not be found in violation of this subsection
if the retailer lacked knowledge that the product contained mercury.

(2) If a mercury-added product is a component of another product,
the product containing the component and the component must both be labeled.
The label on a product containing a mercury-added component must identify the
component with sufficient detail so that it may be readily located for removal.

(3) All labels must be clearly visible prior to sale, and must
inform the purchaser, using words or symbols, that mercury is present in the
product, and that the product should not be disposed of or placed in a waste
stream destined for disposal until the mercury is removed and reused, recycled,
or otherwise managed to ensure that the mercury in the product does not become
mixed with other solid waste or wastewater.

(4) Labels affixed to the product must be constructed of materials
that are sufficiently durable to remain legible for the useful life of the
product.

(5) Responsibility for product and package labels required under
this section is on the manufacturer, and not on the wholesaler or retailer,
unless the wholesaler or retailer agrees with the manufacturer to accept
responsibility in conjunction with implementation of an alternative to the
labeling requirements of this section, approved under subsection (7) or (8) of
this section. In the case of a multicomponent product, the responsible
manufacturer is the last manufacturer to produce or assemble the product. In
the case of a mercury-added product imported from a foreign country, the
importer must ensure that the manufacturer has complied with this section
before sale, use, or distribution of the products in this state. This importer
requirement does not apply to retailers for whom importing is not their primary
business.

(6) Any mercury-added product for which federal law governs
labeling in a manner that preempts state authority is exempt from the
requirements of this section.

(7) Alternative methods of public notification are as follows:

(a) A manufacturer may apply to the department for an alternative
to the requirements of subsections (1) through (6) and (8) of this section
where: Strict compliance with the requirements is not feasible; or the
proposed alternative would be at least as effective in providing presale
notification of mercury content and in providing instructions on proper
disposal; or federal law governs labeling in a manner that preempts state
authority. The department may approve an alternative concerning a certain
product category without application by manufacturers, but must consider other
alternatives for the category, upon application.

(b) Applications for an alternative to the requirements of
subsections (1) through (6) and (8) of this section must:

(i) Document the justification for the requested alternative;

(ii) Describe how the alternative ensures that purchasers or
recipients of mercury-added products are made aware of mercury content prior to
purchase or receipt;

(iii) Describe how a person discarding the product will be made
aware of the need for proper handling to ensure that it does not become part of
solid waste or wastewater;

(iv) Document the readiness of all necessary parties to implement
the proposed alternative; and

(v) Describe the performance measures to be utilized by the
manufacturer to demonstrate that the alternative is providing effective presale
notification and predisposal notification.

(c) The department may grant, deny, or approve with modifications
or conditions a request for an alternative to the requirements of subsections
(1) through (6) and (8) of this section. Such an approval of an alternative
shall be for an indefinite period of no less than two years. The department
may review alternatives and modify or condition a previously approved
alternative, after providing notice to the affected parties. Modifications
must be implemented according to a mutually agreeable time frame that may not
exceed two years. Prior to approving an alternative, the department must
consult with neighboring states, provinces, and regional organizations to
ensure that its labeling requirements are consistent with those of other governments
in the region.

(8) The following alternative methods of public notification for
specific products are approved, and no further department approval is required:

(a) Labeling of white goods sold in a store where the white goods
are on display meets all requirements of subsections (1) through (6) of this
section, except that no package labeling is required.

(b) Labeling of fever and laboratory thermometers must meet all
requirements of subsections (1) through (6) of this section, except that no product
labeling is required.

(c) Labeling of all new motor vehicles must meet all the
requirements of subsections (1) through (6) of this section, except that the
mercury-added components are not required to be labeled. A doorpost label
applied by the manufacturer must list the mercury-added components that may be
present on the vehicle. Only in the case of a dealer trade of a new vehicle
with a dealer in another state is the motor vehicle dealer responsible for
applying the doorpost label to the vehicle to be offered for sale in this
state. No labeling of used motor vehicles is required.

(d) Labeling of mercury-added button cell batteries must meet all
requirements of subsections (1) through (6) of this section, except no labeling
is required on the product. Labeling of products that contain a mercury-added
button cell battery as the only mercury-added component must include in the
product instructions, if any, and on the product packaging the information
required in subsection (3) of this section.

(e) Labeling of consumer electronics that incorporate one or more
mercury-added lamps as their only mercury-added component or components must
meet all the requirements of subsection (1) through (6) of this section, except
no labeling of an internal lamp or the package is required.

(9) The department may adopt rules to implement this section. The rules
may include a requirement to submit for approval a certified labeling plan that
describes the product and all aspects of its proposed labeling. The department
must make efforts to ensure consistency, when practicable and appropriate, with
the labeling requirements that are in use in other states.

(10) The department must work with manufacturers to ensure that
compliance with this section is achieved in a manner that considers the cost
and feasibility of implementation.

(11) Commercial aircraft and aerospace components are exempt from
the requirements of this section.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5. (1) A person may not
knowingly dispose of mercury-added products in any manner other than by
recycling the product or disposing of the product as hazardous waste.

(2) When a mercury-added product is removed from service, the
mercury in the item must be source-separated for reuse or recycling, stabilized
for retirement, or otherwise managed to prevent its release into the
environment.

(3) A person may not knowingly send a multicomponent product
containing a mercury-added product, that has been intentionally flattened,
crushed, or baled, to a scrap processor, as defined in RCW 46.79.010, for
recycling without first removing the mercury-added product. A scrap processor
may accept a multicomponent product, knowing it contains a mercury-added
product, if the processor takes responsibility for removing the mercury-added
product. This subsection (3) does not apply to individuals disposing of
mercury-added household products.

(4) A person engaging in solid waste handling, including solid
waste storage, collection, transportation, treatment, utilization, processing,
incineration, and final disposal of solid wastes, may not knowingly collect or
accept for disposal solid waste that contains one or more mercury-added
products, unless the waste is collected at a permitted household hazardous
waste collection facility for the purpose of recycling the household hazardous
waste. A solid waste collector or transporter will not be deemed to have
knowingly accepted mercury-added products if the solid waste collector or
transporter has provided notification to customers that it is illegal to
dispose of mercury-added products in solid waste containers, and if no
mercury-added products are clearly visible and easily identifiable in the
container. A solid waste treatment, processing, incineration, or disposal
facility will not be deemed to have knowingly accepted a mercury-added product
for processing or disposal if the facility has implemented the following:

(a) Posted signs at the solid waste management facility providing
notice of the prohibition of the disposal and incineration of mercury-added
products; and

(b) Provided written notification to or have contractual agreements
with the solid waste management facility's customers, providing notice of the
prohibition of the disposal and incineration of mercury-added products.

(5) For the purposes of this section a person acts knowingly when:

(a) The person is aware of a fact, facts, or circumstances or
result described by a statute defining a prohibited act; or

(b) The person has information that would lead a reasonable person
in the same situation to believe that the existing facts are the facts
described by a statute defining a prohibited act.

(6) A manufacturer of thermometers or commercial or residential
thermostats that has complied with the requirements of section 3 of this act is
not liable for improper disposal of those products by purchasers or consumers.

(7) Every two years the department must make available to the
public information concerning the amount of mercury diverted from the solid
waste stream that would otherwise be sent to solid waste management facilities
for disposal or incineration.

(8) Those persons involved in the recycling, dismantling, or hulk
hauling of motor vehicles are exempt from this section. The department shall
assemble an advisory committee of parties concerned with and involved in the
recycling and waste disposal of motor vehicles to make recommendations on the
reduction and removal of mercury components from the waste stream caused by the
scrapping and dismantling of motor vehicles. With the help of the advisory
committee, the department shall prepare recommendations to the legislature on
how mercury components may be reduced or eliminated from motor vehicle scrap,
how this will occur, and at what stage of the vehicle's life, as well as the
liable parties. The department's recommendations shall be presented to the legislature
no later than January 1, 2004.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 6. (1) Except as provided
under subsections (2) through (4) of this section, no person may sell, offer
for sale, distribute for sale or use in this state a mercury-added product
unless the manufacturer of the product, or its industry trade group, provides
notice to the director in writing of the manufacturer's intent to sell, offer
for sale, or distribute the product. The notification must include: (a) A
description of the product to be offered for sale, use, or distribution; (b)
the amount of and purpose for mercury in each unit of the product; (c) the
total amount of mercury contained in all products manufactured by the
manufacturer; and (d) the name and address of the manufacturer and of a
contact. The manufacturer must update and revise the information provided in
each notification whenever there is significant change in the information or
when requested by the director. The director may by rule define and adopt specific
requirements for the content and submission of the notification.

(2) With the approval of the director, the manufacturer may supply
the notice required under subsection (1) of this section for a product category
rather than an individual product.

(3) Any mercury-added product for which federal law governs notice
in a manner that preempts state authority is exempt from the requirements of
this section.

(4) Commercial aircraft and aerospace components are exempt from
the requirements of this section.

(5) The director must review the information received under
subsection (1) of this section and must ensure that the information is
available for public inspection upon request.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 7. (1) No person may sell,
offer for sale, or distribute for sale or use in this state a mercury-added
novelty. A manufacturer of mercury-added novelties must notify all retailers
that sell the product about the provisions of this section and how to properly
dispose of any remaining mercury-added novelty inventory.

(2)(a) No person may sell, offer for sale, or distribute for sale
or use in this state a thermometer that contains mercury. This subsection (2)
does not apply to:

(i) An electronic thermometer with a button cell battery containing
mercury if the battery is in compliance with section 3 of this act;

(ii) A thermometer that contains mercury and that is used for food
research and development or food processing, including meat, dairy products,
and pet food processing;

(iii) A thermometer that contains mercury and that is a component
of an animal agriculture climate control system or industrial measurement
system until such a time as the system is replaced or a nonmercury component
for the system is available; and

(iv) A thermometer that contains mercury that is used for
calibration of other thermometers, apparatus, or equipment, unless a nonmercury
calibration standard is approved for the application by the national institute
of standards and technology.

(b) A manufacturer of thermometers that contain mercury must notify
all retailers that sell the product about the provisions of this section and
how to properly dispose of any remaining thermometer inventory.

(3) No person may sell, install, or reinstall a commercial or
residential thermostat that contains mercury. A manufacturer of commercial or
residential thermostats that contain mercury must notify all retailers that
sell the product about the provisions of this section and how to properly dispose
of any remaining commercial or residential thermostat inventory.

(4) No person may sell, offer for sale, or distribute for sale or
use in this state a motor vehicle manufactured after January 1, 2006, if the
motor vehicle contains an automotive mercury switch.

(5) A health care facility may not purchase mercury manometers.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 8. No school may purchase
for use in a primary or secondary classroom bulk elemental or chemical mercury
or bulk mercury compounds. Manufacturers that produce and sell bulk elemental
or chemical mercury or mercury compounds must notify retailers and schools
about the provisions of this section and how to dispose of the remaining
inventory properly.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 9. (1) No later than January
1, 2003, the department, in consultation with the Washington hospital
association and other interested and affected parties, must develop the
following plans for mercury purchase and use at health care facilities:

(a) A mercury elimination plan for thermometers, thermostats,
manometers, and other mercury-added products for which alternatives are
available; and

(b) A mercury reduction plan for lab reagents, lights, batteries,
and other mercury-added products for which alternatives are not available.

(2) For the purposes of this section, "health care
facility" does not include a clinic, physician's office, dentist's office,
veterinarian's office, or a clinic, physician's office, or dentist's office
located within a health maintenance organization.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 10. (1) The department must
develop a plan and proposed budget for a comprehensive public education,
outreach, and assistance program for households, hazardous waste generators,
municipalities, solid waste management districts, small businesses, health care
facilities, scrap metal facilities, dismantlers, institutions of higher
education, schools, and other interested groups. The plan must: (a) Focus on
the hazards of mercury, particularly those associated with the consumption of
mercury-contaminated fresh and saltwater fish, the requirements and obligations
of individuals, manufacturers, and agencies under this chapter, and voluntary
efforts that individuals, institutions, and businesses can undertake to help
further reduce mercury in the environment; (b) include a mechanism for
providing information to retailers, wholesalers, and the public on which
products are mercury-added products and information on possible nonmercury alternatives;
(c) include a description of how manufacturers of mercury-added products and
other affected businesses will be involved in the development and
implementation of a public education and technical assistance program; (d)
describe how the program will assist the municipalities and solid waste
management districts in developing, designing, and disseminating information
for the public about labeled mercury-added products, the requirements of
section 3 of this act regarding the source separation of waste mercury-added
products, and the collection programs that are available to the public under
section 3 of this act; and (e) describe how the program will be directed
specifically at large public and private institutions that use and discard
substantial numbers of waste mercury-added products, and at any other large
users of those products. The plan and proposed budget must be submitted to the
governor and the legislature by January 1, 2003.

(2) The department may develop an awards program to recognize the
accomplishments of manufacturers, municipalities, solid waste management
facilities, solid waste recycling facilities, household hazardous waste
collection facilities, citizens, or entities that go beyond the minimum
requirements established under this chapter and excel at reducing or
eliminating mercury in air emissions, solid waste, and wastewater discharges.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 11. (1) The department of
general administration must, by July 1, 2003, revise its rules, policies, and
guidelines to implement the purpose of this chapter.

(2) The department of general administration must give priority and
preference to the purchase of equipment, supplies, and other products that
contain no mercury-added compounds or components, unless: (a) There is no
economically feasible nonmercury-added alternative that performs a similar
function; or (b) the product containing mercury is designed to reduce
electricity consumption by at least forty percent and there is no nonmercury or
lower mercury alternative available that saves the same or a greater amount of
electricity as the exempted product. In circumstances where a nonmercury-added
product is not available, preference must be given to the purchase of products
that contain the least amount of mercury added to the product necessary for the
required performance and that are not prohibited from sale or distribution
under section 6 of this act.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 12. The department must
review the effectiveness of this chapter and provide a report based upon that
review to the governor and the appropriate legislative committees by December
1, 2006. The report must review the effectiveness of the programs required
under this chapter and recommend ways to improve the programs.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 13. A violation of this
chapter or any rule adopted under this chapter is punishable by a civil penalty
not to exceed one thousand dollars for each violation in the case of a first
violation. Repeat violators are liable for a civil penalty not to exceed five
thousand dollars for each repeat violation. Penalties collected under this
section must be deposited in the state toxics control account created under RCW
70.105D.070.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 14. The department is
authorized to participate in a regional or multistate clearinghouse to assist
in carrying out any of the requirements of this chapter. A clearinghouse may
also be used for coordinating notification and label requirements, developing education
and outreach activities, and maintaining a list of all mercury-added products,
including mercury-added products and novelties that may be subject to the
product ban contained in section 7 of this act.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 15. The department must adopt
rules to implement and enforce this chapter.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 16. (1) The department must
develop a planned strategy for the elimination of mercury from the
environment. This strategy will be known as the mercury chemical action plan.
The development of the mercury chemical action plan will be a model for how all
future chemical action plans will be developed.

(2) The mercury chemical action plan must include, but is not
limited to: (a) Identifying current mercury uses in Washington; (b) analyzing
current state and federal laws, regulations, rules, and voluntary measures that
can be used to reduce or eliminate mercury; (c) identifying mercury reduction
and elimination options; and (d) implementing actions to reduce or eliminate
mercury uses and releases.

(3) In developing the mercury chemical action plan, the department
must involve an advisory committee not to exceed twelve members composed of
adequate and balanced representation of local government, business,
agriculture, and environmental, public health, and community groups. In
addition, the department must invite and strongly encourage any interested
tribes or federal agencies to participate in the advisory committee process.
The advisory committee must be involved in the development of the mercury
chemical action plan. All information that will serve as the basis for any
decisions in the mercury chemical action plan's development must be available
to the advisory committee members. The advisory committee has sixty days to
provide input to the department on the elements of the mercury chemical action
plan. The comments and suggestions made by the advisory committee must be
considered by the department; however, consensus of the advisory committee is
not necessary for the department to move forward in the development of the
mercury chemical action plan. All meetings of the advisory committee are
subject to the provisions of chapter 42.30 RCW. The advisory committee for the
mercury chemical action plan must be established by April 15, 2002.

(4) By June 30, 2002, the department must develop and issue a draft
mercury chemical action plan in consultation with the advisory committee.
Following the release of the draft plan, the department must allow for a
sixty-day public comment period. The department must reconvene the advisory
committee following the comment period to consider the public comments
received.

(5) The final mercury chemical action plan, developed after
considering the public comments and the input of the advisory committee, must
outline actions for the department to take, including, but not limited to the
development of any rules that are within the department's authority and
recommending any legislation.

(6) The mercury chemical action plan must be finalized by December
1, 2002, and implementation must begin no later than January 1, 2003.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 17. Any fiscal impact on the
department of ecology that results from the implementation of this act shall be
paid for out of existing funds previously appropriated out of the state toxics
control account for the implementation of the department's persistent,
bioaccumulative toxic chemical strategy.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 18. (1) Sections 1, 2, and 9
through 15 of this act take effect July 1, 2002.

(2) Sections 3 through 8 of this act take effect January 1, 2003.

(3) Section 16 of this act is necessary for the immediate
preservation of the public peace, health, or safety, or support of the state
government and its existing public institutions, and takes effect immediately.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 19. Sections 1 through 16 and
18 of this act constitute a new chapter in Title 70 RCW.

--- END ---