BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF
WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec.
1. A new section is added
to chapter 70.105D RCW to read as follows:

(1) A truck
transporting soil, sediment, or waste materials containing hazardous substances
above natural background at the facility where a remedial action is occurring
must be covered so as to prevent accidental spillage onto any private or public
property that is not part of the facility if the facility will be removing over
ten million cubic yards of soil, sediment, or waste materials as part of a
remedial action under this chapter.

(2) Any
settlement under RCW 70.105D.040(4), order or agreed order under RCW
70.105D.050, or order or permit issued under chapter 70.105 RCW for a remedial
action that involves the removal of over ten million cubic yards of soil,
sediment, or waste material from a facility must require that any trucks
removing material from the facility be covered so as to prevent accidental
spillage onto any private or public property that is not part of the facility.

--- END ---