BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF
WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1. RCW 15.65.020 and 1993 c
80 s 2 are each amended to read as follows:

The following terms are
hereby defined:

(1)
"Director" means the director of agriculture of the state of
Washington or his or her duly appointed representative. The phrase
"director or his or her designee" means the director unless,
in the provisions of any marketing agreement or order, he or she has
designated an administrator, board, or other designee to act ((for
him)) in the matter designated, in which case "director or his or
her designee" means for such order or agreement the administrator,
board, or other person(s) so designated and not the director.

(2)
"Department" means the department of agriculture of the state of
Washington.

(3) "Marketing
order" means an order ((issued)) adopted by the director ((pursuant
to)) under this chapter that establishes a commodity board for an
agricultural commodity or agricultural commodities with like or common
qualities or producers.

(4) "Marketing
agreement" means an agreement entered into and issued by the director
pursuant to this chapter.

(5) "Agricultural
commodity" means any of the following commodities or products: Llamas,
alpacas, or any other animal or any distinctive type of agricultural,
horticultural, viticultural, floricultural, vegetable, or animal product,
including, but not limited to, products qualifying as organic food products
under chapter 15.86 RCW and private sector cultured aquatic products as defined
in RCW 15.85.020 and other fish and fish products, either in its natural or
processed state, including beehives containing bees and honey and
Christmas trees but not including timber or timber products. The director is
hereby authorized to determine (on the basis of common usage and practice) what
kinds, types or sub-types should be classed together as an agricultural
commodity for the purposes of this chapter.

(6) "Production
area" and "marketing area" means any area defined as such in any
marketing order or agreement in accordance with RCW 15.65.350. "Affected
area" means the marketing or production area so defined in such order,
agreement or proposal.

(7) "Unit" of
an agricultural commodity means a unit of volume, weight, quantity, or other
measure in which such commodity is commonly measured. The director shall designate
in each marketing order and agreement the unit to be used therein.

(8) "Affected
unit" means in the case of marketing agreements and orders drawn on the
basis of a production area, any unit of the commodity specified in or covered
by such agreement or order which is produced in such area and sold or marketed
or delivered for sale or marketing; and "affected unit" means, in the
case of marketing agreements and orders drawn on the basis of marketing area,
any unit of the commodity specified in or covered by such agreement or order
which is stored in frozen condition or sold or marketed or delivered for sale
or marketing within such marketing area: PROVIDED, That in the case of
marketing agreements "affected unit" shall include only those units
which are produced by producers or handled by handlers who have assented to
such agreement.

(9) "Affected
commodity" means that part or portion of any agricultural commodity which
is covered by or forms the subject matter of any marketing agreement or order
or proposal, and includes all affected units thereof as herein defined and no
others.

(10)
"Producer" means any person engaged in the business of producing any
agricultural commodity for market in commercial quantities. "Affected
producer" means any producer ((of an affected commodity)) who is
subject to a marketing order or agreement. "To produce" means to
act as a producer. For the purposes of RCW 15.65.140 and 15.65.160 as now or
hereafter amended "producer" shall include bailees who contract to
produce or grow any agricultural product on behalf of a bailor who retains
title to the seed and its resulting agricultural product or the agricultural
product delivered for further production or increase.

(11)
"Handler" means any person who acts, either as principal, agent or
otherwise, in processing, selling, marketing or distributing an agricultural
commodity or storage of a frozen agricultural commodity which was not produced
by him or her. "Handler" does not mean a common carrier used
to transport an agricultural commodity. "Affected handler" means any
handler of an affected commodity. "To handle" means to act as a
handler.

(12)
"Producer-handler" means any person who acts both as a producer and
as a handler with respect to any agricultural commodity. A producer-handler
shall be deemed to be a producer with respect to the agricultural commodities
which he or she produces, and a handler with respect to the agricultural
commodities which he or she handles, including those produced by himself
or herself.

(13) "Cooperative
association" means any incorporated or unincorporated association of
producers which conforms to the qualifications set out in the act of congress
of the United States of February 18, 1922 as amended, known as the
"Capper-Volstead Act" and which is engaged in making collective sales
or in marketing any agricultural commodity or product thereof or in rendering
service for or advancing the interests of the producers of such commodity on a
nonprofit cooperative basis.

(14) "Member of a
cooperative association" means any producer who markets his or her
product through such cooperative association and who is a voting stockholder of
or has a vote in the control of or is a party to a marketing agreement with
such cooperative association with respect to such product.

(15) "Producer
marketing" or "marketed by producers" means any or all
operations performed by any producer or cooperative association of producers in
preparing for market and marketing, and shall include: (a) selling any
agricultural commodity produced by such producer(s) to any handler; (b)
delivering any such commodity or otherwise disposing of it for commercial
purposes to or through any handler.

(16) "Commercial
quantities" as applied to producers and/or production means such quantities
per year (or other period of time) of an agricultural commodity as the director
finds are not less than the minimum which a prudent man engaged in agricultural
production would produce for the purpose of making such quantity of such
commodity a substantial contribution to the economic operation of the farm on
which such commodity is produced. "Commercial quantities" as applied
to handlers and/or handling means such quantities per year (or other period of
time) of an agricultural commodity or product thereof as the director finds are
not less than the minimum which a prudent man engaged in such handling would
handle for the purpose of making such quantity a substantial contribution to
the handling operation in which such commodity or product thereof is so
handled. In either case the director may in his or her discretion: (a)
Determine that substantial quantity is any amount above zero; and (b)
apply the quantity so determined on a uniform rule applicable alike to all
persons which he or she finds to be similarly situated.

(17) "Commodity
board" means any board established pursuant to RCW 15.65.220.
"Board" means any such commodity board unless a different board is
expressly specified.

(18) "Sell"
includes offer for sale, expose for sale, have in possession for sale,
exchange, barter or trade.

(19)
"Section" means a section of this chapter unless some other statute
is specifically mentioned. The present includes the past and future tenses,
and the past or future the present. The masculine gender includes the feminine
and neuter. The singular number includes the plural and the plural includes
the singular.

(20) "Represented
in a referendum" means that a written document evidencing approval or
assent or disapproval or dissent is duly and timely filed with or mailed to the
director by or on behalf of an affected producer and/or a volume of production
of an affected commodity in a form which the director finds meets the
requirements of this chapter. "Referendum" means a vote by the
affected parties or affected producers which is conducted by secret ballot.

(21) "Person"
((as used in this chapter shall mean any person, firm, association or
corporation)) means any individual, firm, corporation, limited liability
company, trust, association, partnership, society, or any other organization of
individuals, or any unit or agency of local, state, or federal government.

(22) "Affected
parties" means any producer, affected producer, handler, or commodity
board member.

(23)
"Assessment" means the monetary amount established in a marketing
order or agreement that is to be paid by each affected producer to a commodity
board in accordance with the schedule established in the marketing order or
agreement.

(24) "List of
affected parties" means a list containing the names and mailing addresses
of affected parties. This list shall contain the names and addresses of all
affected parties and, if requested by the director, the amount, by unit, of the
affected commodity produced during a designated period under this chapter.

(25) "List of
affected producers" means a list containing the names and mailing
addresses of affected producers. This list shall contain the names and
addresses of all affected producers and, if requested by the director, the
amount, by unit, of the affected commodity produced during a designated period
under this chapter.

(26) "List of
affected handlers" means a list containing the names and addresses of
affected handlers. This list shall contain the names and addresses of all
affected handlers and, if requested by the director, the amount, by unit, of
the affected commodity handled during a designated period under this chapter.

(27)
"Mail" or "send" for purposes of any notice relating to
rule making, referenda, or elections means regular mail or electronic
distribution, as provided in RCW 34.05.260 for rule making. "Electronic
distribution" or "electronically" means distribution by
electronic mail or facsimile mail.

(28) "Percent
by numbers" means the percent of those persons on the list of affected
parties or affected producers.

(29)
"Rule-making proceedings" means the rule-making provisions as
outlined in chapter 34.05 RCW.

(30)
"Vacancy" means that a board member leaves or is removed from a board
position prior to the end of a term, or a nomination process for the beginning
of a term concludes with no candidates for a position.

(31) "Volume of
production" means the percent of the average volume of production of the
affected commodity of those on the list of affected parties or affected
producers for a production period. For the purposes of this chapter, a
production period is a minimum three-year period or as specified in the
marketing order or agreement.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
2. A new section is added
to chapter 15.65 RCW to read as follows:

The history, economy,
culture, and the future of Washington state to a large degree all involve
agriculture. In order to develop and promote Washington's agricultural
products as part of the existing comprehensive scheme to regulate agricultural
commodities, the legislature declares:

(1) That the marketing
of agricultural products within this state is in the public interest. It is
vital to the continued economic well-being of the citizens of this state and
their general welfare that its agricultural commodities be properly promoted by
(a) enabling producers of agricultural commodities to help themselves in
establishing orderly, fair, sound, efficient, and unhampered marketing,
grading, and standardizing of the commodities they produce and (b) working towards
stabilizing the agricultural industry by increasing consumption of agricultural
commodities within the state, the nation, and internationally;

(2) That farmers and
ranchers operate within a regulatory environment that imposes burdens on them
for the benefit of society and the citizens of the state and includes
restrictions on marketing autonomy. Those restrictions may impair the
agricultural producer's ability to compete in local, domestic, and foreign
markets;

(3) That it is now in
the overriding public interest that support for the agricultural industry be
clearly expressed, that adequate protection be given to agricultural
commodities, uses, activities, and operations, and that each agricultural
commodity be promoted individually, and as part of a comprehensive industry to:

(a) Enhance the
reputation and image of Washington state's agricultural commodities;

(b) Increase the sale
and use of Washington state's agricultural commodities in local, domestic, and
foreign markets;

(c) Protect the public by
educating the public in reference to the quality, care, and methods used in the
production of Washington state's agricultural commodities;

(d) Increase the
knowledge of the health-giving qualities and dietetic value of Washington
state's agricultural commodities and products; and

(e) Support and engage
in programs or activities that benefit the planting, production, harvesting,
handling, processing, marketing, and uses of agricultural commodities produced
in Washington state;

(4) That the director
seek to enhance, protect, and perpetuate the ability of the private sector to
produce food and fiber, and seek to maintain the economic well-being of the
agricultural industry in Washington state consistent with its regulatory
activities and responsibilities;

(5) That the director
is hereby authorized to implement, administer, and enforce this chapter through
the adoption of marketing orders that establish commodity boards; and

(6) That this chapter
is enacted in the exercise of the police powers of this state for the purpose
of protecting the health, peace, safety, and general welfare of the people of
this state.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
3. A new section is added
to chapter 15.65 RCW to read as follows:

This chapter and the
rules adopted under it are only one aspect of the comprehensively regulated
agricultural industry.

(1) Other laws
applicable to agricultural commodities include the following chapters and the
rules adopted thereunder:

Chapter 15.08 RCW
Horticultural pests and diseases;

Chapter 15.13 RCW
Horticultural plants and facilities‑-Inspection and licensing;

Chapter 15.14 RCW
Planting stock;

Chapter 15.15 RCW
Certified seed potatoes;

Chapter 15.17 RCW
Standards of grades and packs;

Chapter 15.19 RCW
Certification and inspection of ginseng;

Chapter 15.30 RCW
Controlled atmosphere storage of fruits and vegetables;

Chapter 15.49 RCW
Seeds;

Chapter 15.53 RCW
Commercial feed;

Chapter 15.54 RCW
Fertilizers, minerals, and limes;

Chapter 15.58 RCW
Washington pesticide control act;

Chapter 15.60 RCW
Apiaries;

Chapter 15.64 RCW Farm
marketing;

Chapter 15.83 RCW
Agricultural marketing and fair practices;

Chapter 15.85 RCW
Aquaculture marketing;

Chapter 15.86 RCW
Organic food products;

Chapter 15.92 RCW
Center for sustaining agriculture and natural resources;

Chapter 17.24 RCW
Insect pests and plant diseases;

Chapter 19.94 RCW
Weights and measures;

Chapter 20.01 RCW
Agricultural products‑-Commission merchants, dealers, brokers, buyers,
agents;

Chapter 22.09 RCW Agricultural
commodities;

Chapter 69.04 RCW Food,
drugs, cosmetics, and poisons including provisions of 21 C.F.R. relating to the
general manufacturing practices, food labeling, food standards, food additives,
and pesticide tolerances;

Chapter 69.07 RCW
Washington food processing act;

Chapter 69.25 RCW
Washington wholesome eggs and egg products act;

Chapter 69.28 RCW
Honey;

7 U.S.C., section 136,
Federal Insecticide, Fungicide, and Rodenticide Act.

(2) In
addition to the laws and regulations listed in subsection (1) of this section
that apply to the agricultural industry as a whole, the dry pea and lentil
industry is regulated by or must comply with the additional laws and rules
adopted under 7 U.S.C., chapter 38, Agricultural Marketing Act.

Sec. 4. RCW 15.65.040 and 2001 c
315 s 4 are each amended to read as follows:

((It is hereby
declared to be the policy of this chapter)) The director may adopt a
marketing order that establishes a commodity board under this chapter for any
of the following purposes:

(1) To aid agricultural
producers in preventing economic waste in the marketing of their agricultural
commodities and in developing more efficient methods of marketing agricultural
products.

(2) To enable
agricultural producers of this state, with the aid of the state:

(a) To develop, and
engage in research for developing, better and more efficient production, irrigation,
processing, transportation, handling, marketing, and utilization of
agricultural products;

(b) To establish
orderly marketing of agricultural commodities;

(c) To provide for
uniform grading and proper preparation of agricultural commodities for market;

(d) To provide methods
and means (including, but not limited to, public relations and promotion) for
the maintenance of present markets and for the development of new or larger
markets, both domestic and foreign, for agricultural commodities produced
within this state and for the prevention, modification, or elimination of trade
barriers which obstruct the free flow of such agricultural commodities to
market;

(e) To eliminate or
reduce economic waste in the marketing and/or use of agricultural commodities;

(f) To restore and
maintain adequate purchasing power for the agricultural producers of this
state;

(g) To provide
information or communicate on matters pertaining to the production, irrigation,
processing, transportation, marketing, or uses of an agricultural
commodity produced in Washington state to any elected official or officer or
employee of any agency;

(h) To provide
marketing information and services for producers of an agricultural commodity;

(i) To provide
information and services for meeting resource conservation objectives of
producers of an agricultural commodity;

(j) To engage in
cooperative efforts in the domestic or foreign marketing of food products of an
agricultural commodity;

(k) To provide for
commodity-related education and training; and

(l) To accomplish all
the declared policies of this chapter.

(3) To protect the
interest of consumers by assuring a sufficient pure and wholesome supply of
agricultural commodities of good quality at all seasons and times.

Sec. 5. RCW 15.65.050 and 1961 c
256 s 5 are each amended to read as follows:

The director shall
administer and enforce this chapter and it shall be his or her duty to
carry out its provisions and put them into force in accordance with its terms,
but issuance, amendment, modification, and/or suspension ((and/or
termination)) of marketing agreements and orders and of any terms or
provisions thereof shall be accomplished according to the procedures set forth
in this chapter and not otherwise. Whenever he or she has reason to
believe that the issuance((,)) or amendment ((or termination))
of a marketing agreement or order will tend to effectuate any declared policy or
purpose of this chapter with respect to any agricultural commodity, and in
the case of application for issuance or amendment ten or more producers of such
commodity apply or ((in the case of application for termination ten percent
of the affected producers so apply)) when a petition for amendment is
submitted by majority vote of a commodity board, then the director shall
give due notice of, and an opportunity for, a public hearing upon such
issuance((,)) or amendment ((or termination)), and ((he))
the director shall issue marketing agreements and orders containing the
provisions specified in this chapter and from time to time amend ((or
terminate)) the same whenever upon compliance with and on the basis of
facts adduced in accordance with the procedural requirements of this chapter he
or she shall find that such agreement, order, or amendment:

(1) Will tend to
effectuate one or more of the declared policies of this chapter and is needed
in order to effectuate the same.

(2) Is reasonably
adapted to accomplish the purposes and objects for which it is issued and
complies with the applicable provisions of this chapter.

(3) Has been approved
or favored by the percentages of producers and/or handlers specified in and
ascertained in accordance with this chapter.

Sec. 6. RCW 15.65.060 and 1961 c
256 s 6 are each amended to read as follows:

The director shall
cause any ((proposed)) marketing agreement, order proposed for
issuance, or amendment ((or termination)) to be set out in
detailed form and reduced to writing, which writing is herein designated
"proposal." The director shall make and maintain on file in the
office of the department a copy of each proposal and a full and complete record
of all notices, hearings, findings, decisions, assents, and all other
proceedings relating to each proposal and to each marketing agreement and
order.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
7. A new section is added
to chapter 15.65 RCW to read as follows:

(1) The director may
adopt rules necessary to carry out the director's duties and responsibilities
under this chapter including:

(a) The issuance,
amendment, or termination of marketing orders or agreements;

(b) Procedural,
technical, or administrative rules which may address and include, but are not
limited to:

(i) The submission of a
petition to issue, amend, or terminate a marketing order or agreement under
this chapter;

(ii) Nominations
conducted under this chapter;

(iii) Elections of
board members or referenda conducted under this chapter;

(iv) Actions of the
director upon a petition to issue, amend, or terminate a marketing order or
agreement;

(c) Rules that provide
for a method to fund:

(i) The costs of staff
support for all commodity boards and commissions in accordance with section 78
of this act if the position is not directly funded by the legislature; and

(ii) The actual costs
related to the specific activity undertaken on behalf of an individual
commodity board or commission.

(2) The director may
adopt amendments to marketing agreements or orders without conducting a
referendum if the amendments are adopted under the following criteria:

(a) The proposed
amendments relate only to internal administration of a marketing order or
agreement and are not subject to violation by a person;

(b) The proposed
amendments adopt or incorporate by reference without material change federal
statutes or regulations, Washington state statutes, or rules of other
Washington state agencies, if the material adopted or incorporated regulates
the same activities as are authorized under the marketing order or agreement;

(c) The proposed
amendments only correct typographical errors, make address or name changes, or
clarify language of a rule without changing the marketing order or agreement;
and

(d) The content of the
proposed amendments is explicitly and specifically dictated by statute.

A marketing order or
agreement shall not be amended without a referendum to provide that a majority
of the commodity board members be appointed by the director.

Sec. 8. RCW 15.65.070 and 1987 c
393 s 5 are each amended to read as follows:

The
director shall publish notice of any hearing called for the purpose of
considering and acting upon any proposal for a period of not less than two days
in one or more newspapers of general circulation as the director may
prescribe. No such public hearing shall be held prior to five days after the
last day of such period of publication. Such notice shall set forth the date,
time and place of said hearing, the agricultural commodity and the area covered
by such proposal; a concise statement of the proposal; a concise statement of
each additional subject upon which the director will hear evidence and make a
determination, and a statement that, and the address where, copies of the
proposal may be obtained. The director shall also mail ((a copy of such))
notice to all producers and handlers within the affected area who may be
directly affected by such proposal and whose names and addresses appear, on the
day next preceding the day on which such notice is published, upon lists of
such persons then on file in the department.

Sec. 9. RCW 15.65.090 and 1961 c
256 s 9 are each amended to read as follows:

((In any and every
hearing conducted pursuant to any provision of this chapter)) The
director ((and/or such examiner)) shall have the power to issue
subpoenas for the production of any books, records, or documents of any
kind and to subpoena witnesses to be produced or to appear (as the case may be)
in the county wherein the principal party involved in such hearing resides. No
person shall be excused from attending and testifying or from producing
documentary evidence before the director in obedience to the subpoena of the
director on the ground or for the reason that the testimony or evidence,
documentary or otherwise, required of him or her may tend to incriminate
him or her or subject him or her to a penalty or forfeiture, but
no natural person shall be prosecuted or subject to any penalty or forfeiture
for or on account of any transaction, matter or thing concerning which he or
she may be so required to testify or produce evidence, documentary or
otherwise, before the director in obedience to a subpoena issued by him or
her: PROVIDED, That no natural person so testifying shall be exempt from
prosecution and punishment for perjury committed in so testifying. The
superior court of the county in which any such hearing or proceeding may be
had, may compel the attendance of witnesses and the production of records,
papers, books, accounts, documents and testimony as required by such subpoena.
In case any witness refuses to attend or testify or produce any papers required
by the subpoena, the director or his or her examiner shall so report to
the superior court of the county in which the proceeding is pending by petition
setting forth that due notice was given of the time and place of attendance of
((said)) the witness or the production of ((said)) the
papers and that the witness has been summoned in the manner prescribed in this
chapter and that the fees and mileage of the witness have been paid or tendered
to him or her in accordance with RCW 2.40.020 and that he or she
has failed to attend or produce the papers required by the subpoena at the
hearing, cause, or proceeding specified in the notice and subpoena, or
has refused to answer questions propounded to him or her in the course
of such hearing, cause or proceeding, and shall ask an order of the court to
compel such witness to appear and testify before the director. The court upon
such petition shall enter an order directing the witness to appear before the
court at a time and place to be fixed in such order and then and there show
cause why he or she has not responded to the subpoena. A certified copy
of the show cause order shall be served upon the witness. If it shall appear
to the court that the subpoena was regularly issued, the court shall enter a
decree that ((said)) the witness appear at the time and place
fixed in the decree and testify or produce the required papers, and on failing
to obey said decree the witness shall be dealt with as for contempt of court.

Sec. 10. RCW 15.65.120 and 1985 c
261 s 3 are each amended to read as follows:

The recommended
decision shall contain the text in full of any recommended agreement, order, or
amendment ((or termination)), and may deny or approve the proposal in
its entirety, or it may recommend a marketing agreement, order, or
amendment ((or termination)) containing other or different terms or
conditions from those contained in the proposal: PROVIDED, That the same shall
be of a kind or type substantially within the purview of the notice of hearing
and shall be supported by evidence taken at the hearing or by documents of
which the director is authorized to take official notice. The final decision
shall set out in full the text of the agreement, order, or amendment ((or
termination)) covered thereby, and the director shall issue and deliver or
mail copies of ((said)) the final decision to all producers and
handlers within the affected area who may be directly affected by such final
decision and whose names and addresses appear, on the day next preceding the
day on which such final decision is issued, upon the lists of such persons then
on file in the department, and to all parties of record appearing at the
hearing, or their attorneys of record. If the final decision denies the proposal
in its entirety no further action shall be taken by the director.

Sec. 11. RCW 15.65.170 and 1987 c
393 s 6 are each amended to read as follows:

If the director
determines that the requisite assent has been given ((he shall issue and put
any order or amendment thereto into force, whereupon each and every provision
thereof shall have the force of law. Issuance shall be accomplished by
publication of a notice for one day in a newspaper of general circulation in
the affected area. The notice shall state that the order has been issued and
put into force and where copies of such order may be obtained)) to issue
or amend a marketing order, the issuance or amendment shall be adopted by rule
by the director within thirty days of the validation of the vote. If the
director determines that the requisite assent has not been given no further
action shall be taken by the director upon the proposal, and the order
contained in the final decision shall be without force or effect.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
12. A new section is added
to chapter 15.65 RCW to read as follows:

The director shall not
be required to hold a public hearing or a referendum more than once in any
twelve-month period on petitions to issue, amend, or terminate a commodity
marketing order if any of the following circumstances are present:

(1) The petition
proposes to establish a marketing order or agreement for the same commodity;

(2) The petition
proposes the same or a similar amendment to a marketing order or agreement; or

(3) The petition
proposes to terminate the same marketing order or agreement.

Sec. 13. RCW 15.65.180 and 1961 c
256 s 18 are each amended to read as follows:

The director may, upon
the advice of the commodity board serving under any marketing agreement
or order and without compliance with the provisions of RCW 15.65.050 through
15.65.170((:

(1) Amend any
marketing agreement or order as to any minor matter or wording which does not
substantially alter the provisions and intention of such agreement or order;

(2))), suspend any such agreement or order or
term or provision thereof for a period of not to exceed one year, if ((he))
the director finds that such suspension will tend to effectuate the
declared policy of this chapter((: PROVIDED, That)). Any ((such))
suspension of all or substantially all of ((such)) a marketing
agreement or order by the director shall not become effective until the
end of the then current marketing season.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
14. A new section is added
to chapter 15.65 RCW to read as follows:

The director may
terminate a marketing order or agreement in accordance with this chapter.

(1) To terminate a
marketing order or agreement:

(a) The director must
receive a petition by affected producers under this chapter signed by at least
ten percent of the affected producers; or

(b) A majority of a
commodity board may file a petition with the director.

(2) The petitioners
must include in the petition at the time of filing:

(a) A statement of why
the marketing order or agreement and the commodity board created under it no
longer meets the purposes of this chapter;

(b) The name of a
person designated to represent the petitioners; and

(c) The effective date
of a marketing order or agreement termination, which may not be less than one
year from the date the petition was filed with the director.

(3) Within sixty days
of receipt of a petition meeting the requirements of this section, the director
shall commence rule-making proceedings to repeal the marketing order or
agreement and, subsequently, a referendum on the issue.

(4) The director shall
include a copy of a petition to terminate a marketing order or agreement with
the notice to affected producers when rule-making proceedings are commenced.

(5) If the petitioners
fail to meet the requirements of this chapter, the director shall deny the
petition and a referendum vote will not be conducted. The person designated to
represent the petitioners shall be notified if a petition is denied.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
15. A new section is added
to chapter 15.65 RCW to read as follows:

Except as provided in
RCW 15.65.190 or subsection (4) of this section, the director, prior to
termination of the marketing order or agreement, shall conduct a referendum as
provided in this chapter, the rules adopted by the director, and the applicable
marketing order or agreement.

(1) If a referendum on
the termination of a marketing order or agreement is assented to, the referendum
proposal shall be adopted by the director within thirty days of the count of
the ballots and shall go into effect under chapter 34.05 RCW. If those
affected producers eligible to vote in the referendum do not assent, no further
action shall be taken by the director on the proposal.

(2) The list of
affected producers used for conducting a referendum on the termination of a
marketing order or agreement shall be kept in the rule-making file by the
director. The list shall be certified as a true representation of the
referendum mailing list. Inadvertent failure to notify an affected producer
does not invalidate a referendum.

(3) The list of
affected producers that is certified as the true representation of the mailing
list of a referendum shall be used to determine assent as provided for in RCW
15.65.190.

(4) If the director
determines that one hundred percent of the affected producers have filed a
written application with the director requesting that a marketing order or
agreement be terminated, the director may terminate the marketing order or
agreement without conducting a referendum. The termination of the marketing
order or agreement shall go into effect under chapter 34.05 RCW, but no sooner
than at the end of the marketing season then current.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
16. A new section is added
to chapter 15.65 RCW to read as follows:

If after complying with
the procedures outlined in this chapter and a referendum proposal to terminate
a marketing order or agreement is assented to, the affected commodity board
shall:

(1) Document the
details of all measures undertaken to terminate the marketing order and
identify and document all closing costs;

(2) Contact the office
of the state auditor and arrange for a final audit of the commodity board.
Payment for the audit shall be from commodity board funds and identified in the
budget for closing costs;

(3) Provide for the
reimbursement to affected producers of moneys collected by assessment.
Reimbursement shall be made to those considered affected producers over the
previous three-year time frame on a pro rata basis and at a percent
commensurate with their volume of production over the previous three-year
period unless a different time period is specified in the marketing order or
agreement. If the commodity board finds that the amounts of moneys are so
small as to make impractical the computation and remitting of the pro rata
refund, the moneys shall be paid into the state treasury as unclaimed trust
moneys; and

(4) Transfer all
remaining files to the department for storage and archiving, as appropriate.

Sec. 17. RCW 15.65.200 and 1985 c
261 s 8 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) Whenever
application is made for the issuance of a marketing agreement or order or the
director otherwise determines to hold a hearing for the purpose of such
issuance, the director or ((his)) a designee shall ((cause
lists to be prepared from any information which he has at hand or which he may
obtain from producers, associations of producers and handlers of the affected
commodity. Such lists shall contain the names and addresses of persons who
produce the affected commodity within the affected area, the amount of such
commodity produced by each such person during the period which the director
determines for the purposes of the agreement or order to be representative, and
the name of any cooperative association authorized to market for him within the
affected area the commodity specified in the marketing agreement or order.
Such lists shall also contain the names and addresses of persons who handle the
affected commodity within the affected area and the amount of such commodity
handled by each person during the period which the director determines for the
purposes of the agreement or order to be representative. Any qualified person
may at any time have his name placed upon any list for which he qualifies by
delivering or mailing his name, address and other information to the director
and in such case the director shall verify such person's qualifications and if
he qualifies, place his name upon such list. At every hearing upon the
issuance, amendment or termination of such order or agreement the director or
his designee shall take evidence for the purpose of making such lists complete
and accurate and he may employ his powers of subpoena of witnesses and of
books, records and documents for such purpose. After every such hearing the
director shall compile, complete, correct and bring lists up to date in
accordance with the evidence and information obtained at such hearing. For all
purposes of giving notice, holding referenda and electing members of commodity
boards, the lists on hand corrected up to the day next preceding the date for
issuing notices or ballots as the case may be shall, for all purposes of this
chapter, be deemed to be the list of all persons entitled to notice or to
assent or dissent or to vote)) establish a list of affected parties
along with volume of production data covering a minimum three-year period, or
in such lesser time as the affected party has produced the commodity in
question, from information provided by the petitioners, by obtaining information
on affected parties from applicable producer, handler, or processor
organizations or associations or other sources identified as maintaining the
information.

(2) The director
shall use the list of affected parties for the purpose of notice, referendum
proceedings, and electing and selecting members of commodity boards in
accordance with this chapter.

(3) An affected
party may at any time file his or her name and mailing address with the
director. A list of affected parties may be brought up-to-date by the director
up to the day preceding a mailing of a notice or ballot under this chapter and
that list is deemed the list of affected parties entitled to vote.

(4) The list of
affected parties used for the issuance of a marketing order or agreement shall
be kept in a file maintained by the director. The list shall be certified as a
true representation of the mailing list. Inadvertent failure to notify an
affected party does not invalidate a proceeding conducted under this chapter.

(5) The list of
affected parties that is certified as the true representation of the mailing
list of a referendum shall be used to determine assent as provided in this
chapter.

(6) The director
shall provide the commodity board the list of affected and interested parties
once a marketing order or agreement is adopted and a commodity board is
established as provided in this chapter.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
18. A new section is added
to chapter 15.65 RCW to read as follows:

(1) Pursuant to RCW
42.17.31907, certain agricultural business records, commodity board records,
and department of agriculture records relating to commodity boards and
producers of agricultural commodities are exempt from public disclosure.

(2) Financial and
commercial information and records submitted to either the department or a
commodity board for the purpose of administering this chapter or a marketing
order or agreement may be shared between the department and the applicable
commodity board. They may also be used, if required, in any suit or
administrative hearing involving this chapter or a marketing order or
agreement.

(3) This chapter does
not prohibit:

(a) The issuance of
general statements based upon the reports of a number of persons subject to any
marketing order or agreement as long as the statements do not identify the
information furnished by any person; or

(b) The publication by
the director or a commodity board of the name of any person violating any
marketing order or agreement and a statement of the manner of the violation by
that person.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
19. A new section is added
to chapter 15.65 RCW to read as follows:

(1) Upon completion of
any vote, referendum, or nomination and elections, the department shall tally
the results of the vote and provide the results to affected parties.

(2) If an affected
party disputes the results of a vote, that affected party, within sixty days
from the announced results, shall provide in writing a statement of why the
vote is disputed and request a recount.

(3) Once the vote is
tallied and distributed, all disputes are resolved, and all matters in a vote
are finalized, the individual ballots may be destroyed.

Sec. 20. RCW 15.65.220 and 1961 c
256 s 22 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) Every
marketing agreement and order shall provide for the establishment of a
commodity board of not less than five nor more than thirteen members and shall
specify the exact number thereof and all details as to (a)
qualification, (b) nomination, (c) election or appointment by
the director, (d) term of office, and (e) powers, duties,
and all other matters pertaining to such board.

(2) The members
of the board shall be producers or handlers or both in such proportion as the
director shall specify in the marketing agreement or order, but in any
marketing order or agreement the number of handlers on the board shall
not exceed the number of producers thereon. The marketing order or
agreement may provide that a majority of the board be appointed by the
director, but in any event, no less than one-third of the board members shall
be elected by the affected producers.

(3) In the event
that the marketing order or agreement provides that a majority of the commodity
board be appointed by the director, the marketing order or agreement shall
incorporate either the provisions of section 24 or 25 of this act for board
member selection.

(4) The director
shall appoint to every ((such)) board one ((person)) member
who ((is neither a producer nor a handler to)) represents the ((department
and the public generally)) director. The director shall be a voting
member of each commodity board.

Sec. 21. RCW 15.65.230 and 2001 c
315 s 5 are each amended to read as follows:

A producer member of
each commodity board must be a practical producer of the affected commodity and
must be a citizen, resident of this state, and over the age of eighteen years.
Each producer board member must be and have been actually engaged in producing
such a commodity within the state of Washington for a period of five years and
have, during that period, derived a substantial portion of his or her income
therefrom and not be engaged in business, directly or indirectly, as a handler
or other dealer. A handler member of each board must be a practical handler of
the affected commodity and must be a citizen, resident of this state, and over
the age of ((twenty-five)) eighteen years. Each handler board
member must be and have been, either individually or as an officer or employee
of a corporation, firm, partnership, association, or cooperative, actually
engaged in handling such a commodity within the state of Washington for a
period of five years and have, during that period, derived a substantial
portion of his or her income therefrom. The qualification of a member of the
board as set forth in this section must continue during the term of office.

Sec. 22. RCW 15.65.235 and 1971 c
25 s 1 are each amended to read as follows:

Whenever any commodity
board is formed under the provisions of this chapter and it only affects
producers and producer-handlers, then such producer-handlers shall be
considered to be acting only as producers for purpose of ((election and))
membership on a commodity board: PROVIDED, That this section shall not apply
to a commodity board which only affects producers and producer-handlers of
essential oils.

Sec. 23. RCW 15.65.240 and 1961 c
256 s 24 are each amended to read as follows:

The term of office of
board members shall be three years, and one-third as nearly as may be shall be
elected or appointed every year: PROVIDED, That at the inception of any
agreement or order the entire board shall be elected or appointed
one-third for a term of one year, one-third for a term of two years and
one-third for a term of three years to the end that memberships on such board
shall be on a rotating basis. In the event an order or agreement provides that
both producers and handlers shall be members of such board the terms of each
type of member shall be so arranged that one-third of the handler members as
nearly as may be and one-third of the producer members as nearly as may be
shall be elected or appointed each year.

Any marketing agreement
or order may provide for election or appointment of board members by
districts, in which case district lines and the number of board members to be
elected or appointed from each district shall be specified in such
agreement or order and upon such basis as the director finds to be fair and
equitable and reasonably adapted to effectuate the declared policies of this
chapter.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
24. A new section is added
to chapter 15.65 RCW to read as follows:

(1) This section or
section 25 of this act applies when the director appoints a majority of the
board positions as set forth under RCW 15.65.220(3).

(2) Candidates for
director-appointed board positions on a commodity board shall be nominated
under RCW 15.65.250.

(3) The director shall
cause an advisory vote to be held for the director-appointed positions. Not
less than ten days in advance of the vote, advisory ballots shall be mailed to
all producers or handlers entitled to vote, if their names appear upon the list
of affected parties or affected producers or handlers, whichever is
applicable. Notice of every advisory vote for board membership shall be
published in a newspaper of general circulation within the affected area
defined in the order or agreement not less than ten days in advance of the date
of the vote. The advisory ballot shall be conducted in a manner so that it is
a secret ballot. The names of the two candidates receiving the most votes in
the advisory vote shall be forwarded to the director for potential appointment
to the board. In the event there are only two candidates nominated for a board
position, an advisory vote may not be held and the candidates' names shall be
forwarded to the director for potential appointment.

(4) The candidates
whose names are forwarded to the director for potential appointment shall
submit to the director a letter stating why he or she wishes to be appointed to
the board. The director may select either person for the position.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
25. A new section is added
to chapter 15.65 RCW to read as follows:

(1) This section or
section 24 of this act applies when the director appoints a majority of the
board positions as set forth under RCW 15.65.220(3).

(2) Candidates for
director-appointed board positions on a commodity board shall be nominated
under RCW 15.65.250.

(3) The director shall
cause an advisory vote to be held for the director-appointed positions. Not
less than ten days in advance of the vote, advisory ballots shall be mailed to
all producers or handlers entitled to vote, if their names appear upon the list
of affected parties or affected producers or handlers, whichever is
applicable. Notice of every advisory vote for board membership shall be
published in a newspaper of general circulation within the affected area
defined in the order or agreement not less than ten days in advance of the date
of the vote. The advisory ballot shall be conducted in a manner so that it is
a secret ballot. The name of the candidate receiving the most votes in the
advisory vote shall be forwarded to the director for appointment to the
commodity board.

(4) The director shall
appoint the candidate receiving the most votes in an advisory ballot unless the
candidate fails to meet the qualifications of commodity board members under
this chapter and the marketing order. In the event the director rejects the
candidate receiving the most votes, the position is vacant and shall be filled
under RCW 15.65.270(2).

Sec. 26. RCW 15.65.250 and 1987 c
393 s 7 are each amended to read as follows:

For the purpose of
nominating candidates ((to be voted upon)) for ((election to such))
board memberships, the director shall call separate meetings of the affected
producers and handlers within the affected area and in case elections shall be
by districts ((he)) the director shall call separate meetings for
each district. However, at the inception any marketing agreement or order
nominations may be at the issuance hearing. Nomination meetings shall be
called annually and at least thirty days in advance of the date set for the
election of board members. Notice of every such meeting shall be published in
a newspaper of general circulation within the affected area defined in the
order or agreement not less than ten days in advance of the date of such
meeting and in addition, written notice of every such meeting shall be given to
all on the list of affected parties or affected producers and/or
handlers ((according to the list thereof maintained by the director pursuant
to RCW 15.65.200)), whichever is applicable. However, if the
agreement or order provides for election by districts such written notice need
be given only to the producers or handlers residing in or whose principal place
of business is within such district. Nonreceipt of notice by any interested
person shall not invalidate proceedings at such meetings. Any qualified person
may be nominated orally for membership upon such board at the said meetings.
Nominations may also be made within five days after any such meeting by written
petition filed with the director signed by not less than five producers or
handlers, as the case may be, entitled to have participated in said meeting.

If the board moves and
the director approves that the nomination meeting procedure be deleted, the
director shall give notice of the vacancy by mail to all affected producers or
handlers. The notice shall call for nominations in accordance with the
marketing order or agreement and shall give the final date for filing
nominations which shall not be less than twenty days after the notice was
mailed.

Not more than one
board member may be part of the same "person" as defined by this
chapter. When only one nominee is nominated for any position on the board,
the director shall ((deem that said nominee satisfies the requirements of
the position and then it shall be deemed that said nominee has been duly)) determine
whether the nominee meets the qualifications for the position and, if so, the
director shall declare the nominee elected or appoint the nominee to the
position.

Sec. 27. RCW 15.65.260 and 1985 c
261 s 10 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) The elected
members of every ((such)) commodity board shall be elected by
secret mail ballot under the supervision of the director. Elected producer
members of ((such)) the board shall be elected by a majority of
the votes cast by the affected producers within the affected area, but if the
marketing order or agreement provides for districts such producer members of
the board shall be elected by a majority of the votes cast by the affected
producers in the respective districts. Each affected producer within the
affected area shall be entitled to one vote. Elected handler members of
the board shall be elected by a majority of the votes cast by the affected
handlers within the affected area, but if the marketing order or agreement
provides for districts such handler members of the board shall be elected by a
majority of the votes cast by the affected handlers in the respective
districts. Each affected handler within the affected area shall be entitled to
one vote.

If a nominee does not
receive a majority of the votes on the first ballot a run-off election shall be
held by mail in a similar manner between the two candidates for such position
receiving the largest number of votes.

(2) Notice of
every election for board membership shall be published in a newspaper of
general circulation within the affected area defined in the order or agreement
not less than ten days in advance of the date of such election. Not less than
ten days prior to every election for board membership, the director shall mail
a ballot of the candidates to each producer and handler entitled to vote whose
name appears upon the list ((thereof compiled and maintained by the director
in accordance with RCW 15.65.200)) of affected parties or affected producers
or handlers, whichever is applicable. Any other producer or handler
entitled to vote may obtain a ballot by application to the director upon
establishing his or her qualifications. Nonreceipt of a ballot by any
person entitled to vote shall not invalidate the election of any board member.

Sec. 28. RCW 15.65.270 and 2001
2nd sp.s. c 6 s 1 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) In the event
of a vacancy in an elected position on the board, the remaining board
members shall select a qualified person to fill the ((unexpired term. A
majority of the voting members of the board shall constitute a quorum for the
transaction of all business and the carrying out of all duties of the board.))
vacant position for the remainder of the current term or as provided in the
marketing order or agreement.

(2) In the event of
a vacancy on the board in a position appointed by the director, the remaining
board members shall recommend to the director a qualified person for
appointment to the vacant position. The director shall appoint the person
recommended by the board unless the person fails to meet the qualifications of
board members under this chapter and the marketing order or agreement.

(3) A majority of
the voting members of the board shall constitute a quorum for the transaction
of all business and the carrying out of all duties of the board.

(4) Each member
of the board shall be compensated in accordance with RCW 43.03.230. Members
and employees of the board may be reimbursed for actual travel expenses
incurred in carrying out the provisions of this chapter, as defined under the
commodity board's marketing order or agreement. Otherwise, if not
defined or referenced in the marketing order or agreement, reimbursement
for travel expenses shall be at the rates allowed state employees in accordance
with RCW 43.03.050 and 43.03.060.

Sec. 29. RCW 15.65.280 and 2001 c
315 s 6 are each amended to read as follows:

The powers and duties
of the board shall be:

(1) To elect a chairman
and such other officers as it deems advisable;

(2) To advise and
counsel the director with respect to the administration and conduct of such
marketing agreement or order;

(3) To recommend to the
director administrative rules((, regulations)) and orders and amendments
thereto for the exercise of his or her powers in connection with such
agreement or order;

(4) To advise the
director upon any and all assessments provided pursuant to the terms of such
agreement or order and upon the collection, deposit, withdrawal, disbursement
and paying out of all moneys;

(5) To assist the
director in the collection of such necessary information and data as the
director may deem necessary in the proper administration of this chapter;

(6) To administer the
order or agreement as its administrative board if the director designates it so
to do in such order or agreement;

(7) To work
cooperatively with other local, state, and federal agencies; universities; and
national organizations for the purposes provided in the board's marketing order
or agreement;

(8) To enter into
contracts or interagency agreements with any private or public agency, whether
federal, state, or local, to carry out the purposes provided in the board's
marketing order or agreement. Personal service contracts must comply
with chapter 39.29 RCW;

(9) To accept and
expend or retain any gifts, bequests, contributions, or grants from private
persons or private and public agencies to carry out the purposes provided in
the board's marketing order or agreement;

(10) To retain in
emergent situations the services of private legal counsel to conduct legal
actions on behalf of a board. The retention of a private attorney is subject
to review by the office of the attorney general;

(11) To engage in
appropriate fund-raising activities for the purpose of supporting activities of
the board authorized by the marketing order or agreement;

(12) To enter into
contracts or agreements for research in the production, irrigation,
processing, transportation, marketing, use, or distribution of an
affected commodity;

(13) To participate in
international, federal, state, and local hearings, meetings, and other
proceedings relating to the production, irrigation, manufacture,
regulation, transportation, distribution, sale, or use of affected
commodities including activities authorized under RCW 42.17.190, including the
reporting of those activities to the public disclosure commission; ((and))

(14) To maintain a
list of the names and addresses of affected producers that may be compiled from
information used to collect assessments under the marketing order or agreement,
and data on the value of each producer's production for a minimum three-year
period;

(15) To maintain a
list of the names and addresses of persons who handle the affected commodity
within the affected area and data on the amount and value of the commodity
handled for a minimum three-year period by each person; and

(16) To perform
such other duties as the director may prescribe in the marketing agreement or
order.

Any agreement or order
under which the commodity board administers the order or agreement shall (if so
requested by the affected producers within the affected area in the proposal or
promulgation hearing) contain provisions whereby the director reserves the
power to approve or disapprove every order, rule or directive issued by the
board, in which event such approval or disapproval shall be based on whether or
not the director believes the board's action has been carried out in
conformance with the purposes of this chapter.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
30. A new section is added
to chapter 15.65 RCW to read as follows:

(1) Each commodity
board shall prepare a list of all affected producers from any information
available from the department, producers, producer associations or
organizations, or handlers of the affected commodity. This list shall contain
the names and addresses of all affected persons who produce the affected
commodity and the amount, by unit, of the affected commodity produced during at
least the past three years.

(2) Each commodity
board shall prepare a list of all persons who handle the affected commodity and
the amount of the commodity handled by each person during at least the past
three years.

(3) It is the
responsibility of all affected parties to ensure that their correct address is
filed with the commodity board. It is also the responsibility of affected
parties to submit production data and handling data to the commodity board as
prescribed by the board's marketing order or agreement.

(4) Any qualified
person may, at any time, have his or her name placed upon any list for which he
or she qualifies by delivering or mailing the information to the commodity
board. The lists shall be corrected and brought up-to-date in accordance with
evidence and information provided to the commodity board.

(5) At the director's
request, the commodity board shall provide the director a list of affected
producers or handlers that is certified by the commodity board to be complete
according to the commodity board's records. The list shall contain all
information required by the director to conduct a referendum or board member
election or selection under this chapter and the marketing order or agreement.

(6) For all purposes of
giving notice, holding referenda, and electing or selecting members of a
commodity board, the applicable list corrected up to the day preceding the date
the list is certified by the commodity board and mailed to the director is
deemed to be the list of all affected producers or affected handlers, as
applicable, entitled to notice or to vote. Inadvertent failure to notify an
affected producer or handler does not invalidate a proceeding conducted under
this chapter.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
31. A new section is added
to chapter 15.65 RCW to read as follows:

Agricultural commodity
boards shall adopt rules governing promotional hosting expenditures by
commodity board employees, agents, or board members under RCW 15.04.200.

Sec. 32. RCW 15.65.375 and 1988 c
54 s 1 are each amended to read as follows:

Any marketing agreement
or order may authorize the members of a commodity board, or their agents or
designees, to participate in federal or state hearings or other proceedings
concerning regulation of the manufacture, distribution, sale, or use of any
pesticide as defined by RCW 15.58.030(((1))) (30) or any
agricultural chemical which is of use or potential use in producing the
affected commodity. Any marketing agreement or order may authorize the
expenditure of commodity board funds for this purpose.

Sec. 33. RCW 15.65.380 and 1961 c
256 s 38 are each amended to read as follows:

Any marketing agreement
or order may contain any other, further, and different provisions which
are incidental to and not inconsistent with this chapter and which the director
finds to be needed and reasonably adapted to effectuate the declared policies
of this chapter. ((Such)) The provisions shall set forth the
detailed application of this chapter to the affected agricultural commodity.
((The director or his designee shall have the power to make rules and
regulations of a technical or administrative nature under this chapter and/or
under any agreement or order issued pursuant to this chapter.))

Sec. 34. RCW 15.65.430 and 1961 c
256 s 43 are each amended to read as follows:

Any moneys collected or
received by the director or his or her designee pursuant to the
provisions of any marketing agreement or order during or with respect to any
season or year may be refunded on a pro rata basis at the close of such season
or year or at the close of such longer period as the director determines to be
reasonably adapted to effectuate the declared policies of this chapter and the
purposes of such marketing agreement or order, to all persons from whom such
moneys were collected or received, or may be carried over into and used with
respect to the next succeeding season, year or period whenever the director or
((his)) a designee finds that the same will tend to effectuate
such policies and purposes. ((Upon the termination of any marketing
agreement or order, any and all moneys remaining, and not required to defray
the expenses or repay the obligations incurred and undertaken pursuant to such
agreement or order, shall be returned by the director upon a pro rata basis to
all persons from whom such moneys were collected or received. However, if the
director finds that the amounts so returnable are so small as to make
impractical the computation and remitting of such pro rata refund to such
persons, the director may use such moneys to defray expenses incurred by him in
the formulation, issuance, administration or enforcement of any subsequent
marketing agreement or order for such commodity. Thereafter, if there are any
such moneys remaining which have not been used by the director as hereinabove
provided, the same shall be withdrawn from the approved depository and paid
into the state treasury as unclaimed trust moneys.))

Sec. 35. RCW 15.65.450 and 1961 c
256 s 45 are each amended to read as follows:

Prior to the issuance
of any marketing agreement or order, the director may require the applicants
therefor to deposit with him or her such amount of money as the director
may deem necessary to defray the expenses of preparing and making effective
such agreement or order. ((The director or his designee may reimburse the
applicant from any moneys received by him under such agreement or order for any
moneys so deposited by such applicant and/or for any necessary expenses
incurred by such applicant in preparing and obtaining approval of such
marketing agreement or order upon receipt of a verified statement of such
expense approved by the director or his designee.))

(1) A commodity
board shall reimburse the department for expenses incurred by the department when
a commodity board petitions the director to amend or terminate a marketing
order or agreement and for other services provided by the department under this
chapter. The department shall provide to a commodity board an estimate of
expenses that may be incurred to amend or terminate a marketing order or
agreement prior to any services taking place.

(2) Petitioners who
are not a majority of a commodity board, and who file a petition with the
director to issue, amend, or terminate a marketing order or agreement, shall
deposit funds with the director to pay for expenses incurred by the department,
under rules adopted by the director.

(3) A commodity
board shall reimburse petitioners the amount paid to the department under the
following circumstances:

(a) If the petition
is to issue a marketing order or agreement, the commodity board shall reimburse
the petitioners the amount expended by the department when funds become
available after establishment of the commodity board; or

(b) If the petition
is to amend or terminate a marketing order or agreement and the proposal is
assented to by the affected parties or affected producers, the commodity board
shall reimburse the petitioners within thirty days of the referendum.

(4) If for any
reason a proceeding is discontinued, the commodity board or petitioners,
whichever is applicable, shall only reimburse the department for expenses
incurred by the department up until the time the proceeding is discontinued.

Sec. 36. RCW 15.65.570 and 1961 c
256 s 57 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) All
proceedings ((held by the director for the promulgation of any marketing
agreement or order and the amendment, modification, or dissolution thereof and
all proceedings concerning the promulgation of any rules or regulations or the
amendment or modification thereof and appeals therefrom)) conducted
under this chapter shall be subject to the provisions of chapter 34.05 RCW
((as enacted or hereafter amended)) unless otherwise provided for in
this chapter.

(2) Rule-making
proceedings conducted under this chapter are exempt from compliance with RCW
34.05.310, chapter 19.85 RCW, the regulatory fairness act, and RCW 43.135.055
when the adoption of the rules is determined by a referendum vote of the affected
parties.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
37. The following acts or
parts of acts are each repealed:

(1) RCW 15.65.030 (Declaration of purpose
and police power) and 1961 c 256 s 3;

(2) RCW 15.65.080 (Hearings
public--Oaths--Record--Administrative law judge, powers) and 1981 c 67 s 18
& 1961 c 256 s 8;

(3) RCW 15.65.460 (Marketing act revolving
fund--Composition) and 1961 c 256 s 46; and

(4) RCW 15.65.405 (Annual assessment in
excess of the fiscal growth factor under chapter 43.135 RCW--Hop commodity
board--Mint commodity board) and 1995 c 109 s 1.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
38. A new section is added
to chapter 15.66 RCW to read as follows:

The history, economy,
culture, and the future of Washington state to a large degree all involve
agriculture. In order to develop and promote Washington's agricultural
products as part of the existing comprehensive scheme to regulate agricultural
commodities, the legislature declares:

(1) That the marketing
of agricultural products within this state is in the public interest. It is
vital to the continued economic well-being of the citizens of this state and
their general welfare that its agricultural commodities be properly promoted by
(a) enabling producers of agricultural commodities to help themselves in
establishing orderly, fair, sound, efficient, and unhampered marketing,
grading, and standardizing of the commodities they produce; and (b) working
towards stabilizing the agricultural industry by increasing consumption of
agricultural commodities within the state, the nation, and internationally;

(2) That farmers and
ranchers operate within a regulatory environment that imposes burdens on them
for the benefit of society and the citizens of the state and includes
restrictions on marketing autonomy. Those restrictions may impair the
agricultural producer's ability to compete in local, domestic, and foreign
markets;

(3) That it is now in
the overriding public interest that support for the agricultural industry be
clearly expressed, that adequate protection be given to agricultural
commodities, uses, activities, and operations, and that each agricultural
commodity be promoted individually, and as part of a comprehensive industry to:

(a) Enhance the
reputation and image of Washington state's agricultural commodities;

(b) Increase the sale
and use of Washington state's agricultural commodities in local, domestic, and
foreign markets;

(c) Protect the public
by educating the public in reference to the quality, care, and methods used in
the production of Washington state's agricultural commodities;

(d) Increase the
knowledge of the health-giving qualities and dietetic value of Washington
state's agricultural commodities and products; and

(e) Support and engage
in programs or activities that benefit the planting, production, harvesting,
handling, processing, marketing, and uses of agricultural commodities produced
in Washington state;

(4) That the director
seek to enhance, protect, and perpetuate the ability of the private sector to
produce food and fiber, and seek to maintain the economic well-being of the
agricultural industry in Washington state consistent with its regulatory
activities and responsibilities;

(5) That the director
is hereby authorized to implement, administer, and enforce this chapter through
the adoption of marketing orders that establish commodity commissions; and

(6) That this chapter
is enacted in the exercise of the police powers of this state for the purpose
of protecting the health, peace, safety, and general welfare of the people of
this state.

Sec. 39. RCW 15.66.010 and 1993 c
80 s 3 are each amended to read as follows:

For the purposes of
this chapter:

(1)
"Director" means the director of agriculture of the state of
Washington or any qualified person or persons designated by the director of
agriculture to act for him or her concerning some matter under this
chapter.

(2)
"Department" means the department of agriculture of the state of
Washington.

(3) "Marketing
order" means an order ((issued)) adopted by rule by the
director that establishes a commodity commission for an agricultural
commodity pursuant to this chapter.

(4) "Agricultural
commodity" means any of the following commodities or products: Llamas,
alpacas, or any other animal or any distinctive type of agricultural,
horticultural, viticultural, vegetable, and/or animal product, including, but
not limited to, products qualifying as organic food products under chapter
15.86 RCW and private sector cultured aquatic products as defined in RCW
15.85.020 and other fish and fish products, within its natural or processed
state, including beehives containing bees and honey and Christmas trees
but not including timber or timber products. The director is authorized to
determine what kinds, types or subtypes should be classed together as an
agricultural commodity for the purposes of this chapter.

(5)
"Producer" means any person engaged in the business of producing or
causing to be produced for market in commercial quantities any agricultural
commodity. "To produce" means to act as a producer. For the
purposes of ((RCW 15.66.060, 15.66.090, and 15.66.120, as now or hereafter
amended)) this chapter, "producer" shall include bailees
who contract to produce or grow any agricultural product on behalf of a bailor
who retains title to the seed and its resulting agricultural product or the
agricultural product delivered for further production or increase.

(6) "Affected
producer" means any producer ((of an affected commodity)) who is
subject to a marketing order.

(7) "Affected
commodity" means ((any agricultural commodity for which the director
has established a list of producers pursuant to RCW 15.66.060)) the
agricultural commodity that is specified in the marketing order.

(8) "Commodity
commission" or "commission" means a commission formed to carry
out the purposes of this chapter under a particular marketing order concerning
an affected commodity.

(9) "Unit"
means a unit of volume, quantity or other measure in which an agricultural
commodity is commonly measured.

(10) "Unfair trade
practice" means any practice which is unlawful or prohibited under the
laws of the state of Washington including but not limited to Titles 15, 16 and
69 RCW and chapters 9.16, 19.77, 19.80, 19.84, and 19.83 RCW, or any practice,
whether concerning interstate or intrastate commerce that is unlawful under the
provisions of the act of Congress of the United States, September 26, 1914,
chapter 311, section 5, 38 U.S. Statutes at Large 719 as amended, known as the
"Federal Trade Commission Act of 1914", or the violation of or
failure accurately to label as to grades and standards in accordance with any
lawfully established grades or standards or labels.

(11) "Person"
includes any individual, firm, corporation, limited liability company,
trust, association, partnership, society, or any other organization of
individuals or any unit or agency of local, state, or federal government.

(12) "Cooperative
association" means any incorporated or unincorporated association of
producers which conforms to the qualifications set out in the act of Congress
of the United States, Feb. 18, 1922, chapter 57, sections 1 and 2, 42 U.S. Statutes
at Large 388 as amended, known as the "Capper-Volstead Act" and which
is engaged in making collective sales or in marketing any agricultural
commodity or product thereof or in rendering service for or advancing the
interests of the producers of such commodity on a nonprofit cooperative basis.

(13) "Member of a
cooperative association" or "member" means any producer of an
agricultural commodity who markets his or her product through such
cooperative association and who is a voting stockholder of or has a vote in the
control of or is under a marketing agreement with such cooperative association
with respect to such product.

(14) "Affected
handler" means any handler of an affected commodity.

(15) "Affected
parties" means any producer, affected producer, handler, or commodity
commission member.

(16)
"Assessment" means the monetary amount established in a marketing
order that is to be paid by each affected producer to a commission in
accordance with the schedule established in the marketing order.

(17)
"Mail" or "send," for purposes of any notice relating to
rule making, referenda, or elections, means regular mail or electronic
distribution, as provided in RCW 34.05.260 for rule making. "Electronic
distribution" or "electronically" means distribution by
electronic mail or facsimile mail.

(18)
"Handler" means any person who acts, either as principal, agent, or
otherwise, in the processing, selling, marketing, or distributing of an
agricultural commodity that is not produced by the handler.
"Handler" does not include a common carrier used to transport an
agricultural commodity. "To handle" means to act as a handler.

(19) "List of
affected parties" means a list containing the names and mailing addresses
of affected parties. This list must contain the names and addresses of all
affected parties and, if requested by the director, the amount, by unit, of the
affected commodity produced during a designated period under this chapter.

(20) "List of
affected producers" means a list containing the names and mailing addresses
of affected producers. This list must contain the names and addresses of all
affected producers and, if requested by the director, the amount, by unit, of
the affected commodity produced during a designated period under this chapter.

(21) "List of
affected handlers" means a list containing the names and addresses of
affected handlers. This list must contain the names and addresses of all
affected handlers and, if requested by the director, the amount, by unit, of
the affected commodity handled during a designated period under this chapter.

(22) "Percent
by numbers" means the percent of those persons on the list of affected
parties or affected producers.

(23)
"Referendum" means a vote by the affected parties or affected
producers which is conducted by secret ballot.

(24)
"Rule-making proceedings" means rule making under chapter 34.05 RCW.

(25)
"Vacancy" means that a commission member leaves or is removed from a
position on the commission prior to the end of a term, or a nomination process
for the beginning of a term concludes with no candidates for a position.

(26) "Volume of
production" means the percent of the average volume of production of the
affected commodity of those on the list of affected parties or affected
producers for a production period. For the purposes of this chapter, a
production period is a minimum three-year period or as specified in the
marketing order.

Sec. 40. RCW 15.66.030 and 2001 c
315 s 1 are each amended to read as follows:

Marketing orders may be
made for any one or more of the following purposes:

(1) To establish plans
and conduct programs for advertising and sales promotion, to maintain present
markets, or to create new or larger markets for any agricultural
commodity grown in the state of Washington;

(2) To provide for
carrying on research studies to find more efficient methods of production, irrigation,
processing, transportation, handling, and marketing of any
agricultural commodity;

(3) To provide for
improving standards and grades by defining, establishing, and providing
labeling requirements with respect to the same;

(4) To investigate and
take necessary action to prevent unfair trade practices;

(5) To provide
information or communicate on matters pertaining to the production, irrigation,
processing, transportation, marketing, or uses of an agricultural
commodity produced in Washington state to any elected official or officer or
employee of any agency;

(6) To provide
marketing information and services for producers of an agricultural commodity;

(7) To provide
information and services for meeting resource conservation objectives of
producers of an agricultural commodity;

(8) To engage in
cooperative efforts in the domestic or foreign marketing of food products of an
agricultural commodity; and

(9) To provide for
commodity-related education and training.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
41. A new section is added
to chapter 15.66 RCW to read as follows:

This chapter and the
rules adopted under it are only one aspect of the comprehensively regulated
agricultural industry.

(1) Other laws
applicable to agricultural commodities include the following chapters and the
rules adopted thereunder:

Chapter 15.08 RCW
Horticultural pests and diseases;

Chapter 15.13 RCW
Horticultural plants and facilities‑-Inspection and licensing;

Chapter 15.14 RCW
Planting stock;

Chapter 15.15 RCW
Certified seed potatoes;

Chapter 15.17 RCW
Standards of grades and packs;

Chapter 15.19 RCW
Certification and inspection of ginseng;

Chapter 15.30 RCW
Controlled atmosphere storage of fruits and vegetables;

Chapter 15.49 RCW
Seeds;

Chapter 15.53 RCW
Commercial feed;

Chapter 15.54 RCW
Fertilizers, minerals, and limes;

Chapter 15.58 RCW
Washington pesticide control act;

Chapter 15.60 RCW
Apiaries;

Chapter 15.64 RCW Farm
marketing;

Chapter 15.83 RCW
Agricultural marketing and fair practices;

Chapter 15.85 RCW Aquaculture
marketing;

Chapter 15.86 RCW
Organic food products;

Chapter 15.92 RCW
Center for sustaining agriculture and natural resources;

Chapter 17.24 RCW
Insect pests and plant diseases;

Chapter 19.94 RCW
Weights and measures;

Chapter 20.01 RCW
Agricultural products‑-Commission merchants, dealers, brokers, buyers,
agents;

Chapter 22.09 RCW
Agricultural commodities;

Chapter 69.04 RCW Food,
drugs, cosmetics, and poisons including provisions of 21 C.F.R. relating to the
general manufacturing practices, food labeling, food standards, food additives,
and pesticide tolerances;

Chapter 69.07 RCW
Washington food processing act;

Chapter 69.25 RCW
Washington wholesome eggs and egg products act;

Chapter 69.28 RCW
Honey;

7 U.S.C., section 136,
Federal Insecticide, Fungicide, and Rodenticide Act.

(2) In addition to the
laws and regulations listed in subsection (1) of this section that apply to the
agricultural industry as a whole, the potato industry is regulated by or must
comply with the following additional laws and the rules or regulations adopted
thereunder:

(a) 7 C.F.R., Part 51,
United States standards for grades of potatoes;

(b) 7 C.F.R., Part 946,
Federal marketing order for Irish potatoes grown in Washington;

(c) 7 C.F.R., Part
1207, Potato research and promotion plan.

(3) In addition to the
laws and regulations listed in subsection (1) of this section that apply to the
agricultural industry as a whole, the wheat and barley industries are regulated
by or must comply with the following additional laws and the rules adopted
thereunder:

(a) 7 U.S.C., section
1621, Agricultural Marketing Act;

(b) Chapter 70.94 RCW,
Washington clean air act, agricultural burning.

(4) In addition to the
laws and regulations listed in subsection (1) of this section that apply to the
agricultural industry as a whole, the poultry industry is regulated by or must
comply with the following additional laws and the rules adopted thereunder:

(a) 21 U.S.C., chapter
10, Poultry and poultry products inspection;

(b) 21 U.S.C., chapter
9, Packers and stockyards;

(c) 7 U.S.C., section
1621, Agricultural Marketing Act;

(d) Washington fryer
commission labeling standards.

Sec. 42. RCW 15.66.050 and 1961 c
11 s 15.66.050 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) Petitions
for issuance, amendment or termination of a marketing order shall be signed by
not less than five percent or one hundred of the producers alleged to be
affected, whichever is less, and shall be filed with the director. ((Such
petition shall be accompanied by a filing fee of one hundred dollars payable to
the state treasurer; and shall designate some person as attorney-in-fact for
the purpose of this section. Upon receipt of such a petition, the director
shall prepare a budget estimate for handling such petition which shall include
the cost of the preparation of the estimate, the cost of the hearings and the
cost of the proposed referendum. The petitioners, within thirty days after
receipt of the budget estimate by their attorney-in-fact shall remit to the
director the difference between the filing fee of one hundred dollars already
paid and the total budget estimate. If the petitioners fail to remit the
difference, or if for any other reason the proceedings for the issuance,
amendment or termination of the marketing order are discontinued, the filing
fee, including any additional amount paid in accordance with such budget
estimates shall not be refunded. If the petition results, after proper
proceedings, in the issuance, amendment, or termination of a marketing order,
said petitioners shall be reimbursed for the amount paid for said total filing
fee out of funds of the commodity commission as they become available.)) A
petition for amendment or termination of a marketing order may be submitted to
the director by majority vote of a commission.

(2) A commission
shall reimburse the department for expenses incurred by the department when a
commodity commission petitions the director to amend or terminate a marketing
order and for other services provided by the department under this chapter.
The department shall provide to a commodity commission an estimate of expenses
that may be incurred to amend or terminate a marketing order prior to any
services taking place.

(3) Petitioners who
are not a majority of a commission, and who file a petition with the director
to issue, amend, or terminate a marketing order, shall deposit funds with the
director to pay for expenses incurred by the department, under rules adopted by
the director.

(4) A commission
shall reimburse petitioners the amount paid to the department under the
following circumstances:

(a) If the petition
is to issue a marketing order, the commission shall reimburse the petitioners
the amount expended by the department when funds become available after
establishment of the commission; or

(b) If the petition
is to amend or terminate a marketing order, the commission shall reimburse the
petitioners within thirty days of the referendum if the proposal is assented to
by the affected producers.

(5) If for any
reason a proceeding is discontinued, the commission or petitioners, whichever
is applicable, shall reimburse the department only for expenses incurred by the
department up until the time the proceeding is discontinued.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
43. A new section is added
to chapter 15.66 RCW to read as follows:

(1) All rule-making
proceedings conducted under this chapter shall be in accordance with chapter
34.05 RCW.

(2) Rule-making
proceedings conducted under this chapter are exempt from compliance with RCW
34.05.310, chapter 19.85 RCW, the regulatory fairness act, and RCW 43.135.055
when adoption of the rule is determined by a referendum vote of the affected
parties.

(3) The director may
adopt amendments to marketing orders without conducting a referendum if the
amendments are adopted under the following criteria:

(a) The proposed
amendments relate only to internal administration of a marketing order and are
not subject to violation by a person;

(b) The proposed
amendments adopt or incorporate by reference without material change federal
statutes or regulations, Washington state statutes, or rules of other
Washington state agencies, if the material adopted or incorporated regulates
the same activities as are authorized under the marketing order;

(c) The proposed
amendments only correct typographical errors, make address or name changes, or
clarify language of a rule without changing the marketing order;

(d) The content of the
proposed amendments is explicitly and specifically dictated by statute.

A marketing order shall
not be amended without a referendum to provide that a majority of the commodity
commission members be appointed by the director.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
44. A new section is added
to chapter 15.66 RCW to read as follows:

The director may adopt
rules necessary to carry out the director's duties and responsibilities under
this chapter including:

(1) The issuance,
amendment, suspension, or termination of marketing orders;

(2) Procedural,
technical, or administrative rules which may address and include, but are not
limited to:

(a) The submission of a
petition to issue, amend, or terminate a marketing order under this chapter;

(b) Nominations
conducted under this chapter;

(c) Elections of
commission members or referenda conducted under this chapter; and

(d) Actions of the director
upon a petition to issue, amend, or terminate a marketing order;

(3) Rules that provide
for a method to fund:

(a) The costs of staff
support for all commodity boards and commissions in accordance with section 78
of this act if the position is not directly funded by the legislature; and

(b) The actual costs
related to the specific activity undertaken on behalf of an individual
commodity board or commission.

Sec. 45. RCW 15.66.060 and 1975
1st ex.s. c 7 s 7 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) Upon receipt
of a petition for the issuance((, amendment, or termination)) of a
marketing order, the director shall establish a list of ((producers)) affected
parties of the agricultural commodity affected ((or make any such
existing list current)). In establishing ((or making current such))
a list of ((producers)) affected parties and their individual
production, the director shall publish a notice to producers of the commodity
to be affected requiring them to file with the director a report showing the
producer's name, mailing address, and the yearly average quantity of the
affected commodity produced by him or her in the three years preceding
the date of the notice or in such lesser time as the producer has produced the
commodity in question. ((Such)) Information as to production may
also be accepted from other valid sources if readily available. ((The
notice shall be published once a week for four consecutive weeks in such
newspaper or newspapers, including a newspaper or newspapers of general
circulation within the affected areas, as the director may prescribe, and shall
be mailed to all affected producers on record with the director. All reports
shall be filed with the director within twenty days from the last date of
publication of the notice or within thirty days after the mailing of the notice
to affected producers, whichever is the later. The director shall keep such
lists at all times as current as possible and may require information from
affected producers at various times in accordance with rules and regulations
prescribed by the director: PROVIDED, That any commission established under
the provisions of this chapter may at its discretion prior to any election for
any purpose by such commission carry out the above stated mandate to the
director for establishing a list of producers and their individual production,
and supply the director with a current list of all producers subject to the
provisions of the marketing order under which it was formed.

Such producer list
shall be final and conclusive in making determinations relative to the assent
by producers upon the issuance, amendment or termination of a marketing order
and in elections under the provisions of this chapter.

The director shall
then notify affected producers, so listed, by mail that the public hearing
affording opportunity for them to be heard upon the proposed issuance,
amendment, or termination of the marketing order will be heard at the time and
place stated in the notice. Such notice of the hearing shall be given not less
than ten days nor more than sixty days prior to the hearing.)) Notice of a proposed marketing order
issuance shall be as provided for in RCW 15.66.070.

(2) The director
shall use the list of affected parties for the purpose of notice, referendum
proceedings, and electing or selecting members of the commission in accordance
with this chapter and rules adopted under this chapter.

(3) An affected
party may at any time file his or her name and mailing address with the
director. A list of affected parties may be brought up-to-date by the director
up to the day preceding a mailing of a notice or ballot under this chapter and
that list is deemed the list of affected parties entitled to vote.

(4) The list of
affected parties shall be kept in the rule-making file by the director. The
list shall be certified as a true representation of the referendum mailing
list. Inadvertent failure to notify an affected party does not invalidate a
proceeding conducted under this chapter.

(5) The list of
affected parties that is certified as the true representation of the mailing
list of a referendum shall be used to determine assent as provided in this
chapter.

(6) The director
shall provide the commodity commission the list of affected and interested
parties once a marketing order is adopted and a commodity commission is
established as provided in this chapter.

Sec. 46. RCW 15.66.070 and 1961 c
11 s 15.66.070 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) Notice of a
public hearing to issue, amend, or terminate a marketing order shall be
published once a week for four consecutive weeks in a newspaper or newspapers,
including a newspaper or newspapers of general circulation within the affected
areas, as the director may prescribe, and shall be mailed to all affected
parties or affected producers. The director shall mail notice to all affected
parties or affected producers, as applicable, who may be directly affected by
the proposal and whose names and addresses appear on the list compiled under
this chapter.

(2) At ((the))
a public hearing the director shall receive ((evidence and))
testimony offered in support of, or opposition to, the proposed issuance of,
amendment to, or termination of a marketing order and concerning the terms,
conditions, scope, and area thereof. Such hearing shall be public and all
testimony shall be received under oath. A full and complete record of all
proceedings at such hearings shall be made and maintained on file in the office
of the director, which file shall be open to public inspection. The director
shall base ((his)) any findings upon the testimony ((and
evidence)) received at the hearing, together with any other relevant facts
available ((to him)) from official publications of institutions of
recognized standing. The director shall describe in ((his)) the
findings such official publications upon which any finding is based.

((For such hearings
and for any other hearings under this chapter,)) (3) The director
shall have the power to subpoena witnesses and to issue subpoenas for the
production of any books, records, or documents of any kind.

(4) The superior
court of the county in which any hearing or proceeding may be had may compel
the attendance of witnesses and the production of records, papers, books,
accounts, documents and testimony as required by such subpoena. The director,
in case of the refusal of any witness to attest or testify or produce any
papers required by the subpoena, shall report to the superior court of the
county in which the proceeding is pending by petition setting forth that due
notice has been given of the time and place of attendance of ((said)) the
witness or the production of ((said)) the papers and that the
witness has been summoned in the manner prescribed in this chapter and that he or
she has failed to attend or produce the papers required by the subpoena at
the hearing, cause or proceeding specified in the subpoena, or has refused to
answer questions propounded to him or her in the course of such hearing,
cause, or proceeding, and shall ask an order of the court to compel a
witness to appear and testify before the director. The court upon such petition
shall enter an order directing the witness to appear before the court at a time
and place to be fixed in such order and then and there to show cause why he or
she has not responded to the subpoena. A copy of the order shall be served
upon the witness. If it appears to the court that the subpoena was regularly
issued, it shall enter an order that the witness appear at the time and place
fixed in the order and testify or produce the required papers, and on failing
to obey ((said)) the order the witness shall be dealt with as for
contempt of court.

Sec. 47. RCW 15.66.090 and 1975
1st ex.s. c 7 s 8 are each amended to read as follows:

After the issuance by
the director of the final decision approving the issuance, amendment, or
termination of a marketing order, the director shall determine by a referendum
whether the affected parties or producers assent to the proposed action
or not. The director shall conduct the referendum among the affected parties
or producers based on the list as provided for in RCW 15.66.060, and the
affected parties or producers shall be deemed to have assented to the
proposed issuance or termination order if fifty-one percent or more by number
reply to the referendum within the time specified by the director, and if, of
those replying, sixty-five percent or more by number and fifty-one percent or
more by volume assent to the proposed order. The producers shall be deemed to
have assented to the proposed amendment order if sixty percent or more by
number and sixty percent or more by volume of those replying assent to the
proposed order. The determination by volume shall be made on the basis of
volume as determined in the list of affected producers created under provisions
of RCW 15.66.060, subject to rules and regulations of the director for such
determination. The director shall consider the approval or disapproval of any
cooperative marketing association authorized by its producer members to act for
them in any such referendum, as being the approval or disapproval of the
producers who are members of or stockholders in or under contract with such
association of cooperative producers: PROVIDED, That the association shall
first determine that a majority of the membership of the association authorize
its action concerning the specific marketing order. If the requisite assent is
given, the director shall promulgate the order and shall mail notices of the
same to all affected producers.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
48. A new section is added
to chapter 15.66 RCW to read as follows:

The director may, upon
the request of a commodity commission and without compliance with RCW 15.66.070
through 15.66.090, suspend the commission's order or term or provision thereof
for a period of not to exceed one year, if the director finds that the
suspension will tend to effectuate the declared policy of this chapter. Any
suspension of all, or substantially all, of a marketing order by the director
is not effective until the end of the then current marketing season.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
49. A new section is added
to chapter 15.66 RCW to read as follows:

The director is not
required to hold a public hearing or a referendum more than once in any
twelve-month period on petitions to issue, amend, or terminate a marketing
order if any of the following circumstances are present:

(1) The petition
proposes to establish a marketing order for the same commodity;

(2) The petition
proposes the same or a similar amendment to a marketing order; or

(3) The petition
proposes to terminate the same marketing order.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
50. A new section is added
to chapter 15.66 RCW to read as follows:

(1) Pursuant to RCW
42.17.31907, certain agricultural business records, commodity commission
records, and department of agriculture records relating to commodity commissions
and producers of agricultural commodities are exempt from public disclosure.

(2) Financial and
commercial information and records submitted to either the department or a
commodity commission for the purpose of administering this act or a marketing
order may be shared between the department and the applicable commodity
commission. They may also be used, if required, in any suit or administrative
hearing involving any provision of this chapter or a marketing order.

(3) This chapter does
not prohibit:

(a) The issuance of
general statements based upon the reports of a number of persons subject to any
marketing order as long as the statements do not identify the information
furnished by any person; or

(b) The publication by
the director or a commodity commission of the name of any person violating any
marketing order and a statement of the manner of the violation by that person.

Sec. 51. RCW 15.66.110 and 2001 c
315 s 2 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) Every marketing
order shall establish a commodity commission composed of not less than five nor
more than thirteen members. In addition, the director shall be an ex officio
member of each commodity commission unless otherwise specified in the
marketing order. Commission members shall be citizens and residents of
this state if required by the marketing order, and over the age of eighteen. Not
more than one commission member may be part of the same "person" as
defined by this chapter. The term of office of commission members shall be
three years with the terms rotating so than one-third of the terms will
commence as nearly as practicable each year. However, the first commission
shall be selected, one-third for a term of one year, one-third for a term of
two years, and one-third for a term of three years, as nearly as practicable. Except
as provided in subsection (2) of this section, no less than two-thirds of
the commission members shall be elected by the affected producers and such
elected members shall all be affected producers. The remaining members shall
be appointed by the commission and shall be either affected producers, others
active in matters relating to the affected commodity, or persons not so
related.

(2) A marketing
order may provide that a majority of the commission be appointed by the
director, but in any event, no less than one-third of the commission members
shall be elected by the affected producers.

(3) In the event
that the marketing order provides that a majority of the commission be appointed
by the director, the marketing order shall incorporate either the provisions of
section 52 or 53 of this act for member selection.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
52. A new section is added
to chapter 15.66 RCW to read as follows:

(1) This section or
section 53 of this act applies when the director appoints a majority of the
positions of the commission as set forth under RCW 15.66.110(3).

(2) Candidates for
director-appointed positions on a commission shall be nominated under RCW 15.66.120(1).

(3) Not less than sixty
days nor more than seventy-five days prior to the commencement of a commission
member's term, the director shall cause an advisory vote to be held for the
director-appointed positions. Advisory ballots shall be mailed to all affected
producers and shall be returned to the director not less than thirty days prior
to the commencement of the term. The advisory ballot shall be conducted in a
manner so that it is a secret ballot. The names of the two candidates
receiving the most votes in the advisory vote shall be forwarded to the
director for potential appointment to the commission. In the event there are
only two candidates nominated for a position, an advisory vote may not be held
and the candidates' names shall be forwarded to the director for potential
appointment.

(4) The candidates
whose names are forwarded to the director for potential appointment shall
submit to the director a letter stating why he or she wishes to be appointed to
the commission. The director may select either person for the position.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
53. A new section is added
to chapter 15.66 RCW to read as follows:

(1) This section or
section 52 of this act applies when the director appoints a majority of the positions
on a commission as set forth under RCW 15.66.110(3).

(2) Candidates for
director-appointed positions on a commission shall be nominated under RCW
15.66.120(1).

(3) Not less than sixty
days nor more than seventy-five days prior to the commencement of a commission
member's term, the director shall cause an advisory vote to be held for the
director-appointed positions. Advisory ballots shall be mailed to all affected
producers and shall be returned to the director not less than thirty days prior
to the commencement of the term. The advisory ballot shall be conducted in a
manner so that it is a secret ballot. The name of the candidate receiving the
most votes in the advisory vote shall be forwarded to the director for
appointment to the commission.

(4) The director shall
appoint the candidate receiving the most votes in an advisory ballot unless the
candidate fails to meet the qualifications of commission members under this
chapter and the marketing order. In the event the director rejects the
candidate receiving the most votes, the position is vacant and shall be filled
under RCW 15.66.120(8).

Sec. 54. RCW 15.66.120 and 1975
1st ex.s. c 7 s 9 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) Not less
than ninety days nor more than one hundred and five days prior to the beginning
of each term of each elected commission member, ((the director shall give))
notice ((by mail)) shall be mailed to all affected producers ((of
the vacancy and)) with a call for nominations in accordance with
this section and ((with the)) provisions of the marketing order ((and
shall give)). The notice ((of)) shall give the final
date for filing nominations, which shall not be less than eighty days nor more
than eighty-five days before the beginning of such term. ((Such)) The
notice shall also advise that nominating petitions shall be signed by five
persons qualified to vote for such candidates or, if the number of nominating
signers is provided for in the marketing order, ((such)) then the
number ((as such)) provided in the marketing order ((provides)).

(2) Not less
than sixty days nor more than seventy-five days prior to the commencement of ((such))
a commission member term, the director shall ((submit by)) mail
ballots to all affected producers((, which)). Ballots shall be
required to be returned to the director not less than thirty days prior to the
commencement of ((such)) the term. ((Such)) The
mail ballot shall be conducted in a manner so that it shall be a secret
ballot. With respect to the first commission for a particular commodity, the
director may call for nominations for commission members in the notice
of ((his)) the director's decision following the hearing and the
ballot may be submitted at the time the director's proposed order is submitted
to the affected producers for their assent.

((Said elected))
(3) Commission members may be elected or appointed from various
districts within the area covered by the marketing order if the order so
provides, with the number of members from each district to be in accordance
with the provisions of the marketing order.

(4) The members
of the commission not elected by the affected producers shall be elected by a
majority of the commission at a meeting of the commission within ninety days
prior to expiration of the term ((but to fill nonelective vacancies caused
by other reasons than the expiration of a term, the new member shall be elected
by the commission at its first meeting after the occurrence of the vacancy)),
or appointed by the director under this chapter and the marketing order.

(5) When only
one nominee is nominated for any position on the commission, the director shall
((deem that said nominee satisfies the requirements of the position and then
it shall be deemed that said nominee has been duly)) determine whether
the nominee meets the qualifications of the position and, if so, the director
shall declare the nominee elected or appoint the nominee to the position.

(6) In the event of
a vacancy in an elected commission member position on a commodity commission,
the remaining members shall select a qualified person to fill the vacant
position for the remainder of the current term or as provided in the marketing
order.

(7) In the event of
a vacancy in an appointed member position on a commodity commission, the
appointment of members shall be as specified in the marketing order.

(8) In the event of
a vacancy in a director-appointed member position on a commodity commission,
the remaining members shall recommend to the director a qualified person for
appointment to the vacant position. The director shall appoint the person
recommended by the commission unless the person fails to meet the
qualifications of commission members under this chapter and the marketing
order.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
55. A new section is added
to chapter 15.66 RCW to read as follows:

(1) Upon completion of
any vote, referendum, or nomination and elections, the department shall tally
the results of the vote and provide the results to affected parties.

(2) If an affected
party disputes the results of a vote, that affected party, within sixty days
from the announced results, shall provide in writing a statement of why the
vote is disputed and request a recount.

(3) Once the vote is
tallied and distributed, all disputes are resolved, and all matters in a vote
are finalized, the individual ballots may be destroyed.

Sec. 56. RCW 15.66.130 and 2001
2nd sp.s. c 6 s 2 are each amended to read as follows:

Each commodity
commission shall hold such regular meetings as the marketing order may
prescribe or that the commission by resolution may prescribe, together with
such special meetings that may be called in accordance with provisions of its
resolutions upon reasonable notice to all members thereof. A majority of the voting
members shall constitute a quorum for the transaction of all business of the
commission. ((In the event of a vacancy in an elected or appointed position
on the commission, the remaining elected members of the commission shall select
a qualified person to fill the unexpired term.))

Each member of the
commission shall be compensated in accordance with RCW 43.03.230. Members and
employees of the commission may be reimbursed for actual travel expenses
incurred in carrying out the provisions of this chapter, as defined under the
commodity ((board's)) commission's marketing order. Otherwise,
if not defined or referenced in the marketing order, reimbursement for travel
expenses shall be in accordance with RCW 43.03.050 and 43.03.060.

Sec. 57. RCW 15.66.140 and 2001 c
315 s 3 are each amended to read as follows:

Every ((marketing))
commodity commission shall have such powers and duties in accordance
with provisions of this chapter as may be provided in the marketing order and
shall have the following powers and duties:

(1) To elect a ((chairman))
chair and such other officers as determined advisable;

(2) To adopt, rescind
and amend rules and regulations reasonably necessary for the administration and
operation of the commission and the enforcement of its duties under the
marketing order;

(3) To administer,
enforce, direct and control the provisions of the marketing order and of this
chapter relating thereto;

(4) To employ and
discharge at its discretion such administrators and additional personnel,
attorneys, advertising and research agencies and other persons and firms that
it may deem appropriate and pay compensation to the same;

(5) To acquire personal
property and purchase or lease office space and other necessary real property
and transfer and convey the same;

(6) To institute and
maintain in its own name any and all legal actions, including actions by
injunction, mandatory injunction or civil recovery, or proceedings before
administrative tribunals or other governmental authorities necessary to carry
out the provisions of this chapter and of the marketing order;

(7) To keep accurate
records of all its receipts and disbursements, which records shall be open to
inspection and audit by the state auditor or private auditor designated by the
state auditor at least every five years;

(8) Borrow money and
incur indebtedness;

(9) Make necessary
disbursements for routine operating expenses;

(10) To expend funds
for commodity-related education, training, and leadership programs as each
commission deems expedient;

(11) To work
cooperatively with other local, state, and federal agencies; universities; and
national organizations for the purposes provided in the commission's marketing
order;

(12) To enter into
contracts or interagency agreements with any private or public agency, whether
federal, state, or local, to carry out the purposes provided in the commission's
marketing order. Personal service contracts must comply with chapter 39.29
RCW;

(13) To accept and
expend or retain any gifts, bequests, contributions, or grants from private
persons or private and public agencies to carry out the purposes provided in
the commission's marketing order;

(14) To enter into
contracts or agreements for research in the production, irrigation,
processing, transportation, marketing, use, or distribution of an
affected commodity;

(15) To retain in
emergent situations the services of private legal counsel to conduct legal
actions on behalf of a commission. The retention of a private attorney is
subject to review by the office of the attorney general;

(16) To engage in
appropriate fund-raising activities for the purpose of supporting activities of
the commission authorized by the marketing order;

(17) To participate in
international, federal, state, and local hearings, meetings, and other
proceedings relating to the production, irrigation, manufacture,
regulation, transportation, distribution, sale, or use of affected
commodities including activities authorized under RCW 42.17.190, including the
reporting of those activities to the public disclosure commission; ((and))

(18) To maintain a
list of the names and addresses of affected producers that may be compiled from
information used to collect assessments under the provisions of the marketing
order and data on the value of each producer's production for a minimum
three-year period;

(19) To maintain a
list of the names and addresses of persons who handle the affected commodity
within the affected area and data on the amount and value of the commodity
handled for a minimum three-year period by each person; and

(20) Such other
powers and duties that are necessary to carry out the purposes of this chapter.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
58. A new section is added
to chapter 15.66 RCW to read as follows:

(1) Each commodity
commission shall prepare a list of all affected producers from any information
available from the department, producers, producer associations, organizations,
or handlers of the affected commodity. This list shall contain the names and
addresses of all affected persons who produce the affected commodity and the
amount, by unit, of the affected commodity produced during at least the past
three years.

(2) Each commodity
commission shall prepare a list of all persons who handle the affected
commodity and the amount of the commodity handled by each person during at
least the past three years.

(3) It is the
responsibility of all affected parties to ensure that their correct address is
filed with the commodity commission. It is also the responsibility of affected
parties to submit production data and handling data to the commission as
prescribed by the commission's marketing order.

(4) Any qualified
person may, at any time, have his or her name placed upon any list for which he
or she qualifies by delivering or mailing the information to the commission.
The lists shall be corrected and brought up-to-date in accordance with evidence
and information provided to the commission.

(5) At the director's
request, the commodity commission shall provide the director a certified list of
affected producers or affected handlers from the commodity commission records.
The list shall contain all information required by the director to conduct a
referendum or commission member elections under this chapter.

(6) For all purposes of
giving notice and holding referenda on amendment or termination proposals, and
for giving notice and electing or selecting members of a commission, the
applicable list corrected up to the day preceding the date the list is
certified by the commission and mailed to the director is deemed to be the list
of all affected producers or affected handlers, as applicable, entitled to
notice or to vote. Inadvertent failure to notify an affected producer or
handler does not invalidate a proceeding conducted under this chapter.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
59. A new section is added
to chapter 15.66 RCW to read as follows:

Agricultural commodity
commissions shall adopt rules governing promotional hosting expenditures by
commodity commission employees, agents, or commission members under RCW
15.04.200.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
60. A new section is added
to chapter 15.66 RCW to read as follows:

If after complying with
the procedures outlined in this chapter and a referendum proposal to terminate
a commodity commission is assented to, the affected commodity commission shall:

(1) Document the
details of all measures undertaken to terminate the commodity commission and
identify and document all closing costs;

(2) Contact the office
of the state auditor and arrange for a final audit of the commission. Payment
for the audit shall be from commission funds and identified in the budget for
closing costs;

(3) Provide for the
reimbursement to affected producers of moneys collected by assessment.
Reimbursement shall be made to those considered affected producers over the
previous three-year time frame on a pro rata basis and at a percent
commensurate with their volume of production over the previous three-year
period unless a different time period is specified in the marketing order. If
the commodity commission finds that the amounts of moneys are so small as to
make impractical the computation and remitting of the pro rata refund, the
moneys shall be paid into the state treasury as unclaimed trust moneys; and

(4) Transfer all
remaining files to the department for storage and archiving, as appropriate.

Sec. 61. RCW 15.66.180 and 1961 c
11 s 15.66.180 are each amended to read as follows:

All moneys which are
collected or otherwise received pursuant to each marketing order created under
this chapter shall be used solely by and for the commodity commission concerned
and shall not be used for any other commission, nor the department except
as otherwise provided in this chapter. Such moneys shall be deposited in a
separate account or accounts in the name of the individual commission in any
bank which is a state depositary. All expenses and disbursements incurred and
made pursuant to the provisions of any marketing order shall be paid from
moneys collected and received pursuant to such order without the necessity of a
specific legislative appropriation and all moneys deposited for the account of
any order shall be paid from said account by check or voucher in such form and
in such manner and upon the signature of such person as may be prescribed by
the commission. None of the provisions of RCW 43.01.050 shall be applicable to
any such account or any moneys so received, collected or expended.

Sec. 62. RCW 15.66.185 and 1967
ex.s. c 54 s 2 are each amended to read as follows:

Any funds of any
agricultural commodity commission may be invested in savings or time deposits
in banks, trust companies, and mutual savings banks ((which)) that
are doing business in ((this state)) the United States, up to the
amount of insurance afforded such accounts by the Federal Deposit Insurance
Corporation. This section shall apply to all funds which may be lawfully so
invested, which in the judgment of any agricultural commodity commission are
not required for immediate expenditure. The authority granted by this section
is not exclusive and shall be construed to be cumulative and in addition to
other authority provided by law for the investment of such funds.

Sec. 63. RCW 15.66.245 and 1988 c
54 s 2 are each amended to read as follows:

Any marketing agreement
or order may authorize the members of a commodity commission, or their agents
or designees, to participate in federal or state hearings or other proceedings
concerning regulation of the manufacture, distribution, sale, or use of any
pesticide as defined by RCW 15.58.030(((1))) (30) or any
agricultural chemical which is of use or potential use in producing the
affected commodity. Any marketing agreement or order may authorize the
expenditure of commodity commission funds for this purpose.

Sec. 64. RCW 15.66.260 and 1969 c
66 s 2 are each amended to read as follows:

((All general
administrative expenses of the director in carrying out the provisions of this
chapter shall be borne by the state: PROVIDED, That)) The department
shall be reimbursed for actual costs incurred in conducting nominations and
elections for members of any commodity ((board)) commission
established under the provisions of this chapter. Such reimbursement shall be
made from the funds of the commission for which the nominations and elections
were conducted by the director.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
65. RCW 15.66.020 (Declaration of purpose)
and 1961 c 11 s 15.66.020 are each repealed.

Sec. 66. RCW 42.17.31907 and 2001
c 314 s 18 are each amended to read as follows:

The following
agricultural business records and commodity board and commission
records are exempt from the disclosure requirements of this chapter:

(1) Production or sales
records required to determine assessment levels and actual assessment payments
to commodity boards and commissions formed under chapters 15.24, 15.26,
15.28, 15.44, 15.65, 15.66, 15.74, 15.88, 15.100, and 16.67 RCW or required by
the department of agriculture ((under RCW 15.13.310(4) or 15.49.370(6)))
to administer these chapters or the department's programs;

(2) Consignment
information contained on phytosanitary certificates issued by the department of
agriculture under chapters 15.13, 15.49, and 15.17 RCW or federal phytosanitary
certificates issued under 7 C.F.R. 353 through cooperative agreements with the
animal and plant health inspection service, United States department of
agriculture, or on applications for phytosanitary certification required by the
department of agriculture; and

(3) Financial and
commercial information and records supplied by persons ((to)) (a) to
the department of agriculture for the purpose of conducting a referendum for
the potential establishment of a commodity board or commission; (b) to the
department of agriculture or commodity boards or commissions formed
under chapter((s)) 15.24, 15.28, 15.44, 15.65, 15.66, 15.74, 15.88,
15.100, ((and)) or 16.67 RCW with respect to domestic or export
marketing activities or individual producer's production information.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
67. A new section is added
to chapter 15.26 RCW to read as follows:

(1) Under RCW
42.17.31907, certain agricultural business records, commission records, and
department of agriculture records relating to the commission and producers of
agricultural commodities are exempt from public disclosure.

(2) Financial and
commercial information and records submitted to either the department or the
commission for the purpose of administering this chapter may be shared between
the department and the commission. They may also be used, if required, in any
suit or administrative hearing involving any provision of this chapter or a
marketing order.

(3) This chapter does
not prohibit:

(a) The issuance of
general statements based upon the reports of persons subject to this chapter as
long as the statements do not identify the information furnished by any person;
or

(b) The publication by
the director or the commission of the name of any person violating this chapter
and a statement of the manner of the violation by that person.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
68. A new section is added
to chapter 15.28 RCW to read as follows:

(1) Under RCW
42.17.31907, certain agricultural business records, commission records, and
department of agriculture records relating to the commission and producers of
agricultural commodities are exempt from public disclosure.

(2) Financial and
commercial information and records submitted to either the department or the
commission for the purpose of administering this chapter may be shared between
the department and the commission. They may also be used, if required, in any
suit or administrative hearing involving any provision of this chapter or a
marketing order.

(3) This chapter does
not prohibit:

(a) The issuance of
general statements based upon the reports of persons subject to this chapter as
long as the statements do not identify the information furnished by any person;
or

(b) The publication by
the director or the commission of the name of any person violating this chapter
and a statement of the manner of the violation by that person.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
69. A new section is added
to chapter 15.44 RCW to read as follows:

(1) Under RCW
42.17.31907, certain agricultural business records, commission records, and
department of agriculture records relating to the commission and producers of
agricultural commodities are exempt from public disclosure.

(2) Financial and
commercial information and records submitted to either the department or the
commission for the purpose of administering this chapter may be shared between
the department and the commission. They may also be used, if required, in any
suit or administrative hearing involving any provision of this chapter or a
marketing order.

(3) This chapter does
not prohibit:

(a) The issuance of
general statements based upon the reports of persons subject to this chapter as
long as the statements do not identify the information furnished by any person;
or

(b) The publication by
the director or the commission of the name of any person violating this chapter
and a statement of the manner of the violation by that person.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
70. A new section is added
to chapter 15.88 RCW to read as follows:

(1) Under RCW
42.17.31907, certain agricultural business records, commission records, and
department of agriculture records relating to the commission and producers of
agricultural commodities are exempt from public disclosure.

(2) Financial and
commercial information and records submitted to either the department or the
commission for the purpose of administering this chapter may be shared between
the department and the commission. They may also be used, if required, in any
suit or administrative hearing involving any provision of this chapter or a
marketing order.

(3) This chapter does
not prohibit:

(a) The issuance of
general statements based upon the reports of persons subject to this chapter as
long as the statements do not identify the information furnished by any person;
or

(b) The publication by
the director or the commission of the name of any person violating this chapter
and a statement of the manner of the violation by that person.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
71. A new section is added
to chapter 16.67 RCW to read as follows:

(1) Under RCW
42.17.31907, certain agricultural business records, commission records, and
department of agriculture records relating to the commission and producers of
agricultural commodities are exempt from public disclosure.

(2) Financial and
commercial information and records submitted to either the department or the
commission for the purpose of administering this chapter may be shared between
the department and the commission. They may also be used, if required, in any
suit or administrative hearing involving any provision of this chapter or a
marketing order.

(3) This chapter does
not prohibit:

(a) The issuance of
general statements based upon the reports of persons subject to this chapter as
long as the statements do not identify the information furnished by any person;
or

(b) The publication by
the director or the commission of the name of any person violating this chapter
and a statement of the manner of the violation by that person.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
72. A new section is added
to chapter 15.24 RCW to read as follows:

The director may
provide by rule for a method to fund staff support for all commodity boards and
commissions in accordance with section 78 of this act if a position is not
directly funded by the legislature and costs related to the specific activity
undertaken on behalf of an individual commodity board or commission. The
commission shall provide funds to the department according to the rules adopted
by the director.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
73. A new section is added
to chapter 15.26 RCW to read as follows:

The director may
provide by rule for a method to fund staff support for all commodity boards and
commissions in accordance with section 78 of this act if a position is not
directly funded by the legislature and costs related to the specific activity
undertaken on behalf of an individual commodity board or commission. The
commission shall provide funds to the department according to the rules adopted
by the director.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
74. A new section is added
to chapter 15.28 RCW to read as follows:

The director may
provide by rule for a method to fund staff support for all commodity boards and
commissions in accordance with section 78 of this act if a position is not
directly funded by the legislature and costs related to the specific activity
undertaken on behalf of an individual commodity board or commission. The
commission shall provide funds to the department according to the rules adopted
by the director.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
75. A new section is added
to chapter 15.44 RCW to read as follows:

The director may
provide by rule for a method to fund staff support for all commodity boards and
commissions in accordance with section 78 of this act if a position is not
directly funded by the legislature and costs related to the specific activity
undertaken on behalf of an individual commodity board or commission. The
commission shall provide funds to the department according to the rules adopted
by the director.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
76. A new section is added
to chapter 15.88 RCW to read as follows:

The director may
provide by rule for a method to fund staff support for all commodity boards or
commissions in accordance with section 78 of this act if a position is not
directly funded by the legislature and costs related to the specific activity
undertaken on behalf of an individual commodity board or commission. The
commission shall provide funds to the department according to the rules adopted
by the director.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
77. A new section is added
to chapter 16.67 RCW to read as follows:

The director may
provide by rule for a method to fund staff support for all commodity boards or
commissions in accordance with section 78 of this act if a position is not
directly funded by the legislature and costs related to the specific activity
undertaken on behalf of an individual commodity board or commission. The
commission shall provide funds to the department according to the rules adopted
by the director.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
78. A new section is added
to chapter 43.23 RCW to read as follows:

(1) The director may
provide by rule for a method to fund staff support for all commodity boards and
commissions if a position is not directly funded by the legislature.

(2) Staff support
funded under this section and sections 7(1)(c), 44(3), and 72 through 77 of
this act shall be limited to one-half full-time equivalent employee for all
commodity boards and commissions.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
79. A new section is added
to chapter 16.67 RCW to read as follows:

The history, economy,
culture, and the future of Washington state's agriculture involves the beef
industry. In order to develop and promote beef and beef products as part of an
existing comprehensive scheme to regulate those products the legislature
declares:

(1) That the Washington
state beef commission is created;

(2) That it is vital to
the continued economic well-being of the citizens of this state and their
general welfare that its beef and beef products be properly promoted by (a)
enabling the beef industry to help themselves in establishing orderly, fair,
sound, efficient, and unhampered marketing, grading, and standardizing of beef
and beef products they produce; and (b) working to stabilize the beef industry
by increasing consumption of beef and beef products within the state, the
nation, and internationally;

(3) That beef producers
operate within a regulatory environment that imposes burdens on them for the benefit
of society and the citizens of the state and includes restrictions on marketing
autonomy. Those restrictions may impair the beef producer's ability to compete
in local, domestic, and foreign markets;

(4) That it is in the
overriding public interest that support for the beef industry be clearly
expressed, that adequate protection be given to agricultural commodities, uses,
activities, and operations, and that beef and beef products be promoted
individually, and as part of a comprehensive industry to:

(a) Enhance the
reputation and image of Washington state's agriculture industry;

(b) Increase the sale
and use of beef products in local, domestic, and foreign markets;

(c) Protect the public
by educating the public in reference to the quality, care, and methods used in
the production of beef and beef products, and in reference to the various cuts
and grades of beef and the uses to which each should be put;

(d) Increase the
knowledge of the health-giving qualities and dietetic value of beef products; and

(e) Support and engage
in programs or activities that benefit the production, handling, processing,
marketing, and uses of beef and beef products;

(5) That this chapter
is enacted in the exercise of the police powers of this state for the purpose
of protecting the health, peace, safety, and general welfare of the people of
this state; and

(6) That the beef
industry is a highly regulated industry and that this chapter and the rules
adopted under it are only one aspect of the regulated industry. Other
regulations and restraints applicable to the beef industry include the:

(a) Beef Promotion and
Research Act of 1985, U.S.C. Title 7, Chapter 62;

(b) Beef promotion and
research, 7 C.F.R., Part 1260;

(c) Agricultural
Marketing Act, 7 U.S.C., section 1621;

(d) USDA meat grading,
certification, and standards, 7 C.F.R., Part 54;

(e) Mandatory price
reporting, 7 C.F.R., Part 57;

(f) Grazing permits, 43
C.F.R., Part 2920;

(g) Capper-Volstead
Act, U.S.C. Title 7, Chapters 291 and 292;

(h) Livestock
identification under chapter 16.57 RCW and rules;

(i) Organic food
products act under chapter 15.86 RCW and rules;

(j) Intrastate commerce
in food, drugs, and cosmetics act under chapter 69.04 RCW and rules, including
provisions of 21 C.F.R. relating to the general manufacturing practices, food
labeling, food standards, food additives, and pesticide tolerances;

(k) Washington food
processing act under chapter 69.07 RCW and rules;

(l) Washington food
storage warehouses act under chapter 69.10 RCW and rules;

(m) Animal health under
chapter 16.36 RCW and rules; and

(n) Weights and
measures under chapter 19.94 RCW and rules.

Sec. 80. RCW 16.67.030 and 1999 c
291 s 30 are each amended to read as follows:

For the purpose of this
chapter:

(1)
"Commission" means the Washington state beef commission.

(2)
"Director" means the director of agriculture of the state of
Washington or ((his duly)) an appointed representative.

(3) "Ex officio
members" means those advisory members of the commission who do not have a
vote.

(4)
"Department" means the department of agriculture of the state of
Washington.

(5) "Person"
includes any individual, firm, corporation, trust, association, partnership,
society, or any other organization of individuals.

(6) "Beef
producer" means any person who raises, breeds, grows, or purchases cattle
or calves for beef production.

(7) "Dairy (beef)
producer" means any person who raises, breeds, grows, or purchases cattle
for dairy production and who is actively engaged in the production of fluid
milk.

(8) "Feeder"
means any person actively engaged in the business of feeding cattle and usually
operating a feed lot.

(9)
"Producer" means any person actively engaged in the cattle industry
including beef producers and dairy (beef) producers.

(10) "Washington
cattle" shall mean all cattle owned or controlled by affected producers
and located or sold in the state of Washington.

(11) "Meat
packer" means any person operating a slaughtering establishment subject to
inspection under a federal meat inspection act.

(12) "Livestock
salesyard operator" means any person licensed to operate a cattle auction
market or salesyard under the provisions of chapter 16.65 RCW as enacted or
hereafter amended.

(13)
"Mail" or "send" for purposes of any notice relating to
rule making means regular mail or electronic distribution, as provided in RCW
34.05.260 for rule making. "Electronic distribution" or
"electronically" means distribution by electronic mail or facsimile
mail.

Sec. 81. RCW 16.67.070 and 1991 c
9 s 4 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) In the event
a position on the commission becomes vacant due to resignation,
disqualification, death, or for any other reason, the unexpired term of such
position shall be filled by the director forthwith.

(2) Each member
of the commission shall be compensated in accordance with RCW 43.03.230 ((and)).

(3) Each member or
employee shall be reimbursed for actual travel expenses ((in
accordance with)) incurred in carrying out the provisions of this
chapter as defined by the commission in rule. Otherwise if not defined in
rule, reimbursement for travel expenses shall be at the rates allowed by
RCW 43.03.050 and 43.03.060.

Sec. 82. RCW 16.67.090 and 2000 c
146 s 2 are each amended to read as follows:

The powers and duties
of the commission shall include the following:

(1) To administer and
enforce the provisions of this chapter, and do all things reasonably necessary
to effectuate the purposes of this chapter;

(2) To elect a chairman
and such other officers as it deems advisable;

(3) To employ and discharge
at its discretion a manager, secretary, and such other personnel, including
attorneys engaged in the private practice of law subject to the ((approval
and supervision)) review of the attorney general, as the commission
determines are necessary and proper to carry out the purposes of this chapter,
and to prescribe their duties and powers and fix their compensation;

(4) To adopt, rescind,
and amend rules, regulations, and orders for the exercise of its powers
hereunder subject to the provisions of chapter 34.05 RCW (((Administrative
Procedure Act) as now or hereafter amended)), except that rule-making
proceedings conducted under this chapter are exempt from compliance with RCW
34.05.310, the provisions of chapter 19.85 RCW, the regulatory fairness act,
and the provisions of RCW 43.135.055 when adoption of the rule is determined by
a referendum vote of the affected parties;

(5) To establish by
resolution, a headquarters which shall continue as such unless and until so
changed by the commission. All records, books and minutes of the commission
shall be kept at such headquarters;

(6) To require a bond
of all commission members and employees of the commission in a position of
trust in the amount the commission shall deem necessary. The premium for such bond
or bonds shall be paid by the commission from assessments collected. Such bond
shall not be necessary if any such commission member or employee is covered by
any blanket bond covering officials or employees of the state of Washington;

(7) To establish a beef
commission revolving fund, such fund to be deposited in a bank or banks or
financial institution or institutions, approved for the deposit of state funds,
in which all money received by the commission, except an amount of petty cash
for each day's needs not to exceed one hundred dollars, shall be deposited each
day or as often during the day as advisable; none of the provisions of RCW
43.01.050 as now or hereafter amended shall apply to money collected under this
chapter;

(8) To prepare a budget
or budgets covering anticipated income and expenses to be incurred in carrying
out the provisions of this chapter during each fiscal year;

(9) To incur expense
and enter into contracts and to create such liabilities as may be reasonable
for the proper administration and enforcement of this chapter;

(10) To borrow money,
not in excess of its estimate of its revenue from the current year's
contributions;

(11) To keep or cause
to be kept in accordance with accepted standards of good accounting practice,
accurate records of all assessments, expenditures, moneys and other financial
transactions made and done pursuant to this chapter. Such records, books and accounts
shall be audited at least every five years subject to procedures and methods
lawfully prescribed by the state auditor. Such books and accounts shall be
closed as of the last day of each fiscal year. A copy of such audit shall be
delivered within thirty days after completion thereof to the director, the
state auditor and the commission. On such years and in such event the state
auditor is unable to audit the records, books and accounts within six months
following the close of the audit period it shall be mandatory that the
commission employ a private auditor to make such audit;

(12) To sue and be sued
as a commission, without individual liability for acts of the commission within
the scope of the powers conferred upon it by this chapter;

(13) To cooperate with
any other local, state, or national commission, organization or agency, whether
voluntary or established by state or federal law, including recognized
livestock groups, engaged in work or activities similar to the work and
activities of the commission created by this chapter and make contracts and
agreements with such organizations or agencies for carrying on joint programs
beneficial to the beef industry;

(14) To accept grants,
donations, contributions or gifts from any governmental agency or private
source for expenditures for any purpose consistent with the provisions of this
chapter; and

(15) To operate jointly
with beef commissions or similar agencies established by state laws in
adjoining states.

Sec. 83. RCW 16.67.120 and 2000 c
146 s 5 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) There is hereby
levied an assessment of ((fifty cents)) one dollar per head on
all Washington cattle sold in this state or elsewhere to be paid by the seller
at the time of sale: PROVIDED, That if such sale is accompanied by a brand
inspection by the department such assessment may be collected at the same time,
place and in the same manner as brand inspection fees. Such fees may be
collected by the livestock services division of the department and transmitted
to the commission: PROVIDED FURTHER, That, if such sale is made without a
brand inspection by the department the assessment shall be paid by the seller
and transmitted directly to the commission by the fifteenth day of the month
following the month the transaction occurred.

(2) The procedures for
collecting all state and federal assessments under this chapter shall be as
required by the federal order and as described by rules adopted by the
commission.

Sec. 84. RCW 16.67.122 and 2000 c
146 s 6 are each amended to read as follows:

In addition to the
assessment authorized pursuant to RCW 16.67.120, the commission has the
authority to collect an additional assessment of ((one dollar)) fifty
cents per head for cattle subject to assessment by federal order for the
purpose of providing funds for a national beef promotion and research program.
The manner in which this assessment will be levied and collected shall be
established by rule. The authority to collect this assessment shall be
contingent upon the implementation of federal legislation providing for a
national beef promotion and research program and the establishment of the
assessment requirement to fund its activities.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
85. A new section is added
to chapter 16.67 RCW to read as follows:

The commission has the
power to subpoena witnesses and to issue subpoenas for the production of any
books, records, or documents of any kind for the purpose of enforcing this
chapter.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
86. A new section is added
to chapter 16.67 RCW to read as follows:

(1) The commission
shall reimburse the director for necessary costs for services conducted on
behalf of the commission under this chapter.

(2) The commission may
enter into an agreement with the director to administer this chapter or chapter
34.05 RCW.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
87. A new section is added
to chapter 15.44 RCW to read as follows:

The history, economy,
culture, and the future of Washington state's agriculture involves the dairy
industry. In order to develop and promote Washington's dairy products as part
of an existing comprehensive scheme to regulate those products the legislature
declares:

(1) That the Washington
state dairy products commission is created. The commission may also take
actions under the name "the dairy farmers of Washington";

(2) That it is vital to
the continued economic well-being of the citizens of this state and their
general welfare that its dairy products be properly promoted by (a) enabling
the dairy industry to help themselves in establishing orderly, fair, sound,
efficient, and unhampered marketing, grading, and standardizing of the dairy
products they produce; and (b) working to stabilize the dairy industry by
increasing consumption of dairy products within the state, the nation, and
internationally;

(3) That dairy
producers operate within a regulatory environment that imposes burdens on them
for the benefit of society and the citizens of the state and includes
restrictions on marketing autonomy. Those restrictions may impair the dairy
producer's ability to compete in local, domestic, and foreign markets;

(4) That it is in the
overriding public interest that support for the dairy industry be clearly
expressed, that adequate protection be given to agricultural commodities, uses,
activities, and operations, and that dairy products be promoted individually, and
as part of a comprehensive industry to:

(a) Enhance the
reputation and image of Washington state's agriculture industry;

(b) Increase the sale
and use of Washington state's dairy products in local, domestic, and foreign
markets;

(c) Protect the public by
educating the public in reference to the quality, care, and methods used in the
production of Washington state's dairy products;

(d) Increase the
knowledge of the health giving qualities and dietetic value of dairy products;
and

(e) Support and engage
in programs or activities that benefit the production, handling, processing,
marketing, and uses of dairy products produced in Washington state;

(5) That this chapter
is enacted in the exercise of the police powers of this state for the purpose
of protecting the health, peace, safety, and general welfare of the people of
this state; and

(6) That the dairy
industry is a highly regulated industry and that this chapter and the rules
adopted under it are only one aspect of the regulated industry. Other regulations
and restraints applicable to the dairy industry include the:

(a) Federal marketing
order under 7 C.F.R., Part 1124;

(b) Dairy promotion
program under the dairy and tobacco adjustment act of 1983, Subtitle B;

(c) Milk and milk
products act under chapter 15.36 RCW and rules, including the:

(i) The national
conference of interstate milk shippers pasteurized milk ordinance;

(ii) The national
conference of interstate milk shippers dry milk ordinance;

(iii) Standards for the
fabrication of single-service containers;

(iv) Procedures
governing cooperative state-public health service;

(v) Methods of making
sanitation ratings of milk supplies;

(vi) Evaluation and
certification of milk laboratories; and

(vii) Interstate milk
shippers;

(d) Milk and milk
products for animal food act under chapter 15.37 RCW and rules;

(e) Organic food
products act under chapter 15.86 RCW and rules;

(f) Intrastate commerce
in food, drugs, and cosmetics act under chapter 69.04 RCW and rules, including
provisions of 21 C.F.R. relating to the general manufacturing practices, milk
processing, food labeling, food standards, and food additives;

(g) Washington food
processing act under chapter 69.07 RCW and rules;

(h) Washington food
storage warehouses act under chapter 69.10 RCW and rules;

(i) Animal health under
chapter 16.36 RCW and rules;

(j) Weighmasters under
chapter 15.80 RCW and rules; and

(k) Dairy nutrient
management act under chapter 90.64 RCW and rules.

Sec. 88. RCW 15.44.010 and 1985 c
261 s 17 are each amended to read as follows:

As used in this
chapter:

"Commission"
means the Washington state dairy products commission;

To "ship"
means to deliver or consign milk or cream to a person dealing in, processing, distributing,
or manufacturing dairy products for sale, for human consumption or industrial
or medicinal uses;

"Handler"
means one who purchases milk, cream, or skimmed milk for processing,
manufacturing, sale, or distribution;

"Dealer"
means one who handles, ships, buys, and sells dairy products, or who acts as
sales or purchasing agent, broker, or factor of dairy products;

"Mail" or
"send" for purposes of any notice relating to rule making, referenda,
or elections means regular mail or electronic distribution, as provided in RCW
34.05.260 for rule making. "Electronic distribution" or
"electronically" means distribution by electronic mail or facsimile
mail;

"Processor"
means a person who uses milk or cream for canning, drying, manufacturing,
preparing, or packaging or for use in producing or manufacturing any product
therefrom;

"Producer"
means a person who produces milk from cows and sells it for human or animal
food, or medicinal or industrial uses;

"Maximum
authorized assessment rate" means the level of assessment most recently
approved by a referendum of producers;

"Current level of
assessment" means the level of assessment paid by the producer as set by
the commission which cannot exceed the maximum authorized assessment rate.

Sec. 89. RCW 15.44.020 and 1979
ex.s. c 238 s 2 are each amended to read as follows:

((There
is hereby created a Washington state dairy products commission to be thus known
and designated: PROVIDED, That the commission may take actions under the name,
"the dairy farmers of Washington".)) The dairy products
commission shall be composed of not more than ten members. There shall be one
member from each district who shall be a practical producer of dairy products
to be elected by such producers, one member shall be a dealer, and one
member shall be a producer who also acts as a dealer, and such dealer and
producer who acts as a dealer shall be appointed by the director of
agriculture, and the director of agriculture shall be an ex officio member without
vote.

Sec. 90. RCW 15.44.035 and 1965
ex.s. c 44 s 7 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) The
commission shall prior to each election, in sufficient time to satisfy the
requirements of RCW 15.44.033, furnish the director with a list of all
producers within the district for which the election is being held. The
commission shall require each dealer and shipper in addition to the information
required under RCW 15.44.110 to furnish the commission with a list of names of
producers whose milk they handle.

(2) Any producer
may on his or her own motion file his or her name with the
commission for the purpose of receiving notice of election.

(3) It is the
responsibility of each producer to ensure that his or her correct address is
filed with the commission.

(4) For all purposes
of giving notice, holding referenda, and electing members of the commission,
the applicable list of producers corrected up to the day preceding the date the
list is certified and mailed to the director is deemed to be the list of all
producers or handlers, as applicable, entitled to notice or to vote. The list
shall be corrected and brought up-to-date in accordance with evidence and
information provided to the commission.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
91. A new section is added
to chapter 15.44 RCW to read as follows:

(1) The commission
shall reimburse the director for necessary costs for services conducted on
behalf of the commission under this chapter.

(2) The commission may
enter into an agreement with the director to administer this chapter or chapter
34.05 RCW.

Sec. 92. RCW 15.44.038 and 1984 c
287 s 15 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) A majority
of the commission members shall constitute a quorum for the transaction of all
business and the performance of all duties of the commission.

(2) Each member
shall be compensated in accordance with RCW 43.03.230 ((and)). Each
member or employee shall be reimbursed for actual travel expenses incurred
in carrying out the provisions of this chapter as defined by the commission in
rule. Otherwise, if not defined in rule, reimbursement for travel expenses
shall be at the rates allowed by RCW 43.03.050 and 43.03.060.

Sec. 93. RCW 15.44.060 and 1999 c
300 s 1 are each amended to read as follows:

The commission shall
have the power and duty to:

(1) Elect a chairman
and such other officers as it deems advisable, and adopt, rescind, and amend
rules, regulations, and orders for the exercise of its powers, which shall have
the effect of law when not inconsistent with existing laws;

(2) Administer and
enforce the provisions of this chapter and perform all acts and exercise all
powers reasonably necessary to effectuate the purpose hereof;

(3) Employ and
discharge advertising counsel, advertising agents, and such attorneys, agents,
and employees as it deems necessary, and prescribe their duties and powers and
fix their compensation;

(4) Establish offices,
incur expenses, enter into contracts, and create such liabilities as are
reasonable and proper for the proper administration of this chapter;

(5) Investigate and
prosecute violations of this chapter;

(6) Conduct scientific
research designed to improve milk production, quality, transportation,
processing, and distribution and to develop and discover uses for products of
milk and its derivatives;

(7) Make in its name
such ((advertising)) contracts and other agreements as are necessary to build
demand and promote the sale of dairy products on either a state, national,
or foreign basis;

(8) Keep accurate
records of all its dealings, which shall be open to public inspection and audit
by the regular agencies of the state;

(9) Conduct the
necessary research to develop more efficient and equitable methods of marketing
dairy products, and enter upon, singly or in participation with others, the
promotion and development of state, national, or foreign markets; ((and))

(10) Participate in
federal and state agency hearings, meetings, and other proceedings relating to
the regulation of the production, manufacture, distribution, sale, or use of
dairy products, to provide educational meetings and seminars for the dairy
industry on such matters, and to expend commission funds for such activities;

(11) Retain the
services of private legal counsel to conduct legal actions, on behalf of the
commission. The retention of a private attorney is subject to the review of
the office of the attorney general;

(12) Work
cooperatively with other local, state, and federal agencies, universities, and
national organizations for the purposes of this chapter;

(13) Accept and
expend or retain any gifts, bequests, contributions, or grants from private
persons or private and public agencies to carry out the purposes of this
chapter;

(14) Engage in
appropriate fund-raising activities for the purpose of supporting activities of
the commission authorized by this chapter;

(15) Expend funds
for commodity-related education, training, and leadership programs as the
commission deems appropriate; and

(16)
Work cooperatively with nonprofit and other organizations to carry out the
purposes of this chapter.

Sec. 94. RCW 15.44.070 and 1975
1st ex.s. c 7 s 39 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) Every rule((,
regulation,)) or order made by the commission shall be filed with the
director and published in two legal newspapers, one east and one west of
the Cascade mountains ((and one west thereof)), within ten days after it
is ((promulgated)) adopted, and ((shall become)) is
effective ((pursuant to the provisions of)) as set forth under
RCW 34.05.380.

(2) Rule-making
proceedings conducted under this chapter are exempt from compliance with RCW
34.05.310, the provisions of chapter 19.85 RCW, the regulatory fairness act,
and the provisions of RCW 43.135.055 when adoption of the rule is determined by
a referendum vote of the affected parties.

Sec. 95. RCW 15.44.080 and 1985 c
261 s 18 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) There is hereby
levied upon all milk produced in this state an assessment of ((0.6%)):

(a) 0.75 percent
of class I price for 3.5((%)) percent butter fat milk as
established in any market area by a market order in effect in that area or by
the state department of agriculture in case there is no market order for that
area; ((and)) or

(b) While the
federal dairy and tobacco adjustment act of 1983, Title I, Subtitle B-dairy
promotion program, is in effect:

(i) An assessment
rate not to exceed the rate approved at the most recent referendum that would
achieve a ten cent per hundredweight credit to local, state, or regional
promotion organizations provided by Title I, Subtitle B of the federal dairy
and tobacco adjustment act of 1983; and

(ii) An additional
assessment of 0.625 of one cent per hundredweight.

(2) Subject to
approval by a producer referendum as provided in this section, the commission
shall have the further power and duty to increase the amount of the maximum
authorized assessment rate to be levied upon either milk or cream according to
the necessities required to effectuate the stated purpose of the commission.

In determining such necessities,
the commission shall consider one or more of the following:

(a) The necessities
of((‑-)):

(i) Developing
better and more efficient methods of marketing milk and related dairy products;

(ii) Aiding
dairy producers in preventing economic waste in the marketing of their
commodities;

(iii) Developing
and engaging in research for developing better and more efficient production,
marketing, and utilization of agricultural products;

(iv) Establishing
orderly marketing of dairy products;

(v) Providing
for uniform grading and proper preparation of dairy products for market;

(vi) Providing
methods and means including but not limited to public relations and promotion,
for the maintenance of present markets, for development of new or larger
markets, both domestic and foreign, for dairy products produced within this
state, and for the prevention, modification, or elimination of trade
barriers which obstruct the free flow of such agricultural commodities to
market;

(vii) Restoring
and maintaining adequate purchasing power for dairy producers of this state;
and

(viii) Protecting
the interest of consumers by assuring a sufficient pure and wholesome supply of
milk and cream of good quality;

(b) The extent and
probable cost of required research and market promotion and advertising;

(c) The extent of
public convenience, interest, and necessity; and

(d) The probable
revenue from the assessment as a consequence of its being revised.

(3)(a) This
section shall apply where milk or cream is marketed either in bulk or package.
However, this section shall not apply to milk or cream used upon the farm or in
the household where produced.

(b) The increase
in the maximum authorized assessment rate to be charged producers on milk and
cream provided for in this section shall not become effective until approved by
fifty-one percent of the producers voting in a referendum conducted by the
commission.

The referendum for
approval of any increase in the maximum authorized assessment rate provided for
in this section shall be by secret mail ballot furnished to all producers
paying assessments to the commission. The commission shall furnish ballots to
producers at least ten days in advance of the day it has set for concluding the
referendum and counting the ballots. Any interested producer may be present at
such time the commission counts ((said)) the ballots.

Sec. 96. RCW 15.44.085 and 1979
ex.s. c 238 s 5 are each amended to read as follows:

There is hereby levied
on every hundredweight of class I or class II milk, as defined in RCW
15.44.087, sold by a dealer, including any milk sold by a producer who acts as
a dealer, an assessment of:

(1) Five-eighths of one
cent per hundredweight. Such assessment shall be in addition to the producer
assessment paid by any producer who also acts as a dealer.

(2) Any additional
assessment, within the power and duty of the commission to levy, such that the
total assessment shall not exceed one cent per hundredweight, as required to
effectuate the purpose of this section.

Such
assessment may be increased by approval of dealers and producers who also act
as dealers, subject to the standards set forth in chapter 15.44 RCW for
increasing or decreasing assessments. The funds derived from such assessment
shall be used for educational programs ((in institutions of learning))
and the sum of such funds derived annually from said dealers and producers who
act as dealers shall be matched by assessments derived from producers for the
purpose of funding ((said)) the educational purposes ((in
institutions of learning)) by an amount not less than the moneys collected
from dealers and producers who act as dealers.

Sec. 97. RCW 15.44.110 and 1961 c
11 s 15.44.110 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) Each dealer
and shipper shall at such times as by rule ((or regulation)) required((,))
file with the commission a return under oath on forms to be furnished by the
commission, stating the quantity of dairy products handled, processed,
manufactured, delivered, and shipped, and the quantity of all milk and cream
delivered to or purchased by such person from the various producers of dairy
products or their agents in the state during the period or periods prescribed
by the commission.

(2) The commission
has the authority to issue subpoenas for the production of books, records,
documents, and other writings of any kind and may issue subpoenas to witnesses
to give testimony.

Sec. 98. RCW 15.44.140 and 1961 c
11 s 15.44.140 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) The
commission through its agents may inspect the premises and records of any
carrier, handler, dealer, manufacturer, processor, or distributor of dairy
products for the purpose of enforcing this chapter.

(2) The commission
has the authority to issue subpoenas for the production of books, records,
documents, and other writings of any kind for any carrier, handler, dealer,
manufacturer, processor, or distributor of dairy products for the purpose of
enforcing this chapter.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
99. A new section is added
to chapter 15.44 RCW to read as follows:

The commission is
authorized to adopt rules governing promotional hosting expenditures by
commission employees, agents, or board members under RCW 15.04.200.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
100. A new section is added
to chapter 15.44 RCW to read as follows:

The commission may
establish foundations using commission funds as grant money when the foundation
benefits the dairy products industry. Commission funds may only be used for
the purposes authorized in this chapter.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
101. A new section is added
to chapter 15.44 RCW to read as follows:

Any board member of the
commission may be a member or officer of an association that has the same
objectives for which the commission was formed. The commission may contract with
the association for services necessary to carry out any purposes authorized
under this chapter if an appropriate written contract has been entered into.

Sec. 102. RCW 15.44.150 and 1961 c
11 s 15.44.150 are each amended to read as follows:

((The state shall
not be liable for the acts or on the contracts of the commission, nor shall any
member or employee of the commission be liable on its contracts.)) Any
action by the commission administrator, member, employee, or agent thereof
pertaining to the performance or nonperformance or misperformance of any
matters or things authorized, required, or permitted by this chapter, and any
other liabilities, debts, or claims against the commission shall be enforced in
the same manner as if the commission were a corporation. Liability for the
debts or actions of the commission's administrator, member, employee, or agent
incurred in their official capacity under this chapter does not exist either
against the administrator, members, employees, and agents in their individual
capacity or the state of Washington. The administrator, its members, and its
agents and employees are not responsible individually in any way whatsoever to
any person for errors in judgment, mistakes, or other acts, either of
commission or omission, as principal, agent, person, or employee, except for
their own individual acts of dishonesty or crime.

All persons employed or
contracting under this chapter shall be limited to, and all salaries, expenses,
and liabilities incurred by the commission shall be payable only from the funds
collected ((hereunder)) under this chapter.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
103. A new section is added
to chapter 15.28 RCW to read as follows:

The history, economy,
culture, and the future of Washington state's agriculture involves the
production of soft tree fruits. In order to develop and promote Washington's
soft tree fruits as part of an existing comprehensive regulatory scheme the
legislature declares:

(1) That the Washington
state fruit commission is created;

(2) That it is vital to
the continued economic well-being of the citizens of this state and their
general welfare that its soft tree fruits be properly promoted by (a) enabling
the soft tree fruit industry to help themselves in establishing orderly, fair,
sound, efficient, and unhampered cooperative marketing, grading, and
standardizing of soft tree fruits they produce; and (b) working to stabilize
the soft tree fruit industry by increasing consumption of soft tree fruits
within the state, the nation, and internationally;

(3) That producers of
soft tree fruits operate within a regulatory environment that imposes burdens
on them for the benefit of society and the citizens of the state and includes
restrictions on marketing autonomy. Those restrictions may impair the
producers of soft tree fruits in their ability to compete in local, domestic,
and foreign markets;

(4) That it is in the
overriding public interest that support for the soft tree fruit industry be
clearly expressed, that adequate protection be given to agricultural
commodities, uses, activities, and operations, and that soft tree fruits be
promoted individually, and as part of a comprehensive industry to:

(a) Enhance the
reputation and image of Washington state's agriculture industry;

(b) Increase the sale
and use of Washington state's soft tree fruits in local, domestic, and foreign
markets;

(c) Protect the public
by educating the public in reference to the quality, care, and methods used in
the production of Washington state's soft tree fruits;

(d) Increase the
knowledge of the health-giving qualities and dietetic value of soft tree
fruits;

(e) Support and engage
in cooperative programs or activities that benefit the production, handling,
processing, marketing, and uses of soft tree fruits produced in Washington
state;

(5) That this chapter
is enacted in the exercise of the police powers of this state for the purpose
of protecting the health, peace, safety, and general welfare of the people of
this state and to stabilize and protect the soft tree fruit industry of the
state; and

(6) That the production
and marketing of soft tree fruit is a highly regulated industry and that the
provisions of this chapter and the rules adopted under it are only one aspect
of the regulated industry. Other regulations and restraints applicable to the
soft tree fruit industry include:

(a) The federal
marketing order under 7 C.F.R. Part 922 (apricots);

(b) The federal
marketing order under 7 C.F.R. Part 923 (sweet cherries);

(c) The federal
marketing order under 7 C.F.R. Part 924 (prunes);

(d) The federal
marketing order under 7 C.F.R. Part 930 (tart cherries);

(e) The federal
marketing order under 7 C.F.R. Part 931 (Bartlett pears);

(f) Tree fruit research
act under chapter 15.26 RCW;

(g) Controlled
atmosphere storage of fruits and vegetables under chapter 15.30 RCW;

(h) Organic food
products act under chapter 15.86 RCW;

(i) Intrastate commerce
in food, drugs, and cosmetics under chapter 69.04 RCW and rules;

(j) Washington food
processing act under chapter 69.07 RCW;

(k) Washington food
storage warehouses act under chapter 69.10 RCW;

(l) Weighmasters under
chapter 15.80 RCW;

(m) Horticultural pests
and diseases under chapter 15.08 RCW;

(n) Horticultural
plants and facilities - inspection and licensing under chapter 15.13 RCW;

(o) Planting stock
under chapter 15.14 RCW;

(p) Standards of grades
and packs under chapter 15.17 RCW;

(q) Washington
pesticide control act under chapter 15.58 RCW;

(r) Farm marketing
under chapter 15.64 RCW;

(s) Insect pests and
plant diseases under chapter 17.24 RCW;

(t) Weights and
measures under chapter 19.94 RCW;

(u) Agricultural
products - commission merchants, dealers, brokers, buyers, and agents under
chapter 20.01 RCW; and

(v) Rules under the
Washington Administrative Code, Title 16.

Sec. 104. RCW 15.28.010 and 1989 c
354 s 27 are each amended to read as follows:

As used in this
chapter:

(1)
"Commission" means the Washington state fruit commission.

(2)
"Shipment" or "shipped" includes loading in a conveyance to
be transported to market for resale, and includes delivery to a processor or
processing plant, but does not include movement from the orchard where grown to
a packing or storage plant within this state for fresh shipment;

(3) "Handler"
means any person who ships or initiates the shipping operation, whether as
owner, agent or otherwise;

(4) "Dealer"
means any person who handles, ships, buys, or sells soft tree fruits other than
those grown by him or her, or who acts as sales or purchasing agent,
broker, or factor of soft tree fruits;

(5)
"Processor" or "processing plant" includes every person or
plant receiving soft tree fruits for the purpose of drying, dehydrating,
canning, pressing, powdering, extracting, cooking, quick-freezing, brining, or
for use in manufacturing a product;

(6) "Soft tree
fruits" mean Bartlett pears and all varieties of cherries, apricots,
prunes, plums, and peaches, which includes all varieties of nectarines.
"Bartlett pears" means and includes all standard Bartlett pears and
all varieties, strains, subvarieties, and sport varieties of Bartlett pears including
Red Bartlett pears, that are harvested and utilized at approximately the same
time and approximately in the same manner.

(7) "Commercial
fruit" or "commercial grade" means soft tree fruits meeting the
requirements of any established or recognized fresh fruit or processing grade.
Fruit bought or sold on orchard run basis and not subject to cull weighback
shall be deemed to be "commercial fruit."

(8) "Cull
grade" means fruit of lower than commercial grade except when such fruit
included with commercial fruit does not exceed the permissible tolerance
permitted in a commercial grade;

(9)
"Producer" means any person who is a grower of any soft tree fruit;

(10) "District No.
1" or "first district" includes the counties of Chelan,
Okanogan, Grant, Douglas, Ferry, Stevens, Pend Oreille, Spokane and Lincoln;

(11) "District No.
2" or "second district" includes the counties of Kittitas,
Yakima, and Benton county north of the Yakima river;

(12) "District No.
3" or "third district" comprises all of the state not included
in the first and second districts;

(13)
"Mail" or "send" for purposes of any notice relating to
rule making, referenda, or elections means regular mail or electronic
distribution, as provided in RCW 34.05.260 for rule making. "Electronic
distribution" or "electronically" means distribution by
electronic mail or facsimile mail;

(14)
"Department" means the department of agriculture;

(15)
"Director" means the director of agriculture.

Sec. 105. RCW 15.28.020 and 1967 c
191 s 1 are each amended to read as follows:

((A corporation to
be known as the Washington state fruit commission is hereby created,)) The
commission is composed of sixteen voting members, ((to wit)) as
follows: Ten producers, four dealers, and two processors, who ((shall
be)) are elected and qualified as ((herein)) provided in
this chapter. The director ((of agriculture, hereinafter referred to as
the director, or his duly)), or an authorized representative, shall
be an ex officio member without a vote.

A majority of the
voting members ((shall)) constitute a quorum for the transaction of any
business.

Sec. 106. RCW 15.28.110 and 1961 c
11 s 15.28.110 are each amended to read as follows:

The commission's duties
are:

(1) To adopt a ((corporate))
commission seal;

(2) To elect a
secretary-manager((,)) and a treasurer, and fix their compensation. The
same person may be elected to both ((of said)) offices;

(3) To establish
classifications of soft tree fruits;

(4) To conduct
scientific research and develop the healthful, therapeutic, and dietetic
value of ((said)) fruits, and promote the general welfare of the soft
tree fruit industry of the state;

(5) To conduct a
comprehensive advertising and educational campaign to effectuate the objects of
this chapter;

(6) To increase the
production, and develop and expand the markets, and improve the handling and
quality of ((said)) fruits;

(7) To keep accurate
accounts and records of all of its dealings, which shall be open to inspection
and audit by the state auditor;

(8) To investigate and
prosecute violations ((hereof)) of this chapter; and

(9) To serve as an
advisory committee to the director with regard to the adoption and enforcement
of rules:

(a) Governing the
grading, packing, and size and dimensions of commercial containers of soft tree
fruits; and

(b) Fixing
commercial grades of soft tree fruits and the issuance of certificates of
inspection for those fruits.

Sec. 107. RCW 15.28.130 and 1961 c
11 s 15.28.130 are each amended to read as follows:

Neither the state, nor
any member, agent, or employee of the commission, ((shall be)) is
liable for the acts of the commission, or upon its contracts.

All salaries, expenses,
costs, obligations, and liabilities of the commission, and claims
arising from the administration of this chapter, ((shall be)) are
payable only from funds collected ((hereunder)) under this chapter.

In any civil or
criminal action or proceeding for violation of any rule of statutory or common
law against monopolies or combinations in restraint of trade, including any
action under chapter 19.86 RCW, proof that the act complained of was done in
compliance with the provisions of this chapter, and in furtherance of the
purposes and provisions of this chapter, is a complete defense to such an
action or proceeding.

Sec. 108. RCW 15.28.250 and 1961 c
11 s 15.28.250 are each amended to read as follows:

Unless the assessment
has been paid by the grower and evidence thereof submitted by him or her,
the dealer, handler, or processor ((shall be)) is responsible for
the payment of all assessments ((hereunder)) under this chapter
on all soft tree fruits handled, shipped, or processed by him or her but
he or she shall charge the same against the grower, who shall be
primarily responsible for such payment. Assessments are due upon receipt of
an invoice for the assessments.

If the assessment
becomes delinquent, the department shall cease to provide inspection services
under chapter 15.17 RCW to the delinquent party until that party pays all
delinquent assessments, interest, and penalties.

Any assessment due
and payable under this section constitutes a personal debt of every person so
assessed or who otherwise owes the same. In addition, the commission may add
to such unpaid assessment or sum an amount not exceeding ten percent of the
same to defray the cost of enforcing the collecting of the same. In the event
of failure of such person or persons to pay any such due and payable assessment
or other such sum, the commission may bring a civil action against such person
or persons, together with the specified ten percent thereon, and such action
shall be tried and judgment rendered as in any other cause of action for debt
due and payable.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
109. A new section is added
to chapter 15.28 RCW to read as follows:

Rule-making proceedings
conducted under this chapter are exempt from compliance with RCW 34.05.310 and
the provisions of chapter 19.85 RCW, the regulatory fairness act, when adoption
of the rule is determined by a referendum vote of the affected parties.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
110. A new section is added
to chapter 15.88 RCW to read as follows:

The history, economy,
culture, and future of Washington state's agriculture involves the wine
industry. In order to develop and promote wine grapes and wine as part of an
existing comprehensive scheme to regulate those products the legislature
declares:

(1) That it is vital to
the continued economic well‑being of the citizens of this state and their
general welfare that its wine grapes and wine be properly promoted by (a)
enabling the wine industry to help themselves in establishing orderly, fair,
sound, efficient, and unhampered marketing of wine grapes and wines they
produce; and (b) working to stabilize the wine industry by increasing markets
for wine grapes and wine within the state, the nation, and internationally;

(2) That wine grape
growers and wine producers operate within a regulatory environment that imposes
burdens on them for the benefit of society and the citizens of the state and
includes restrictions on marketing autonomy. Those restrictions may impair the
wine grape growers' and wine producers' ability to compete in local, domestic,
and foreign markets;

(3) That it is in the
overriding public interest that support for the wine industry be clearly
expressed; that adequate protection be given to agricultural commodities, uses,
activities, and operations; and that wine grapes and wine be promoted
individually, and as part of a comprehensive industry to:

(a) Enhance the reputation
and image of Washington state's agriculture industry;

(b) Increase the sale
and use of wine grapes and wine in local, domestic, and foreign markets;

(c) Protect the public
by educating the public in reference to the quality, care, and methods used in
the production of wine grapes and wine;

(d) Increase the
knowledge of the qualities and value of Washington's wine grapes and wine; and

(e) Support and engage
in programs or activities that benefit the production, handling, processing,
marketing, and uses of wine grapes and wine;

(4) That this chapter
is enacted in the exercise of the police powers of this state for the purpose
of protecting the health, peace, safety, and general welfare of the people of
this state; and

(5) That the production
and marketing of wine grapes and wine is a highly regulated industry and that
the provisions of this chapter and the rules adopted under it are only one
aspect of the regulated industry. Other regulations and restraints applicable
to the wine grape and wine industry include:

(a) Organic food
products act under chapter 15.86 RCW;

(b) Horticultural pests
and diseases under chapter 15.08 RCW;

(c) Horticultural
plants and facilities‑-inspection and licensing under chapter 15.13 RCW;

(d) Planting stock
under chapter 15.14 RCW;

(e) Washington
pesticide control act under chapter 15.58 RCW;

(f) Insect pests and
plant diseases under chapter 17.24 RCW;

(g) Wholesale
distributors and suppliers of wine and malt beverages under chapter 19.126 RCW;

(h) Weights and measures
under chapter 19.94 RCW;

(i) Title 66 RCW,
alcoholic beverage control;

(j) Title 69 RCW, food,
drugs, cosmetics, and poisons including provisions of 21 C.F.R. relating to the
general manufacturing practices, food labeling, food standards, food additives,
and pesticide tolerances;

(k) Chapter 69.07 RCW,
Washington food processing act;

(l) 27 U.S.C., Secs.
201 through 211, 213 through 219a, and 122A;

(m) 27 C.F.R., Parts 1,
6, 9, 10, 12, 16, 240, 251, 252; and

(n) Rules under Titles
16 and 314 WAC, and rules adopted under chapter 15.88 RCW.

Sec. 111. RCW 15.88.050 and 1987 c
452 s 5 are each amended to read as follows:

The director shall
appoint the members of the commission. In making such appointments of the
voting members, the director shall take into consideration recommendations made
by the growers' association and the wine institute as the persons recommended
for appointment as members of the commission. In appointing persons to the
commission, the director shall seek to ensure as nearly as possible a balanced
representation on the commission which would reflect the composition of the
growers and wine producers throughout the state as to number of acres
cultivated and amount of wine produced.

The appointment shall
be carried out immediately subsequent to July 1, 1987, and members so appointed
as set forth in this chapter shall serve for the periods set forth for the
original members of the commission under RCW 15.88.040.

In the event a position
on the commission becomes vacant due to resignation, disqualification, death,
or for any other reason, the unexpired term of the position shall immediately
be filled by appointment by the director.

Each member or
employee of the commission shall be reimbursed for actual travel
expenses ((in accordance with)) incurred in carrying out the
provisions of this chapter as defined by the commission in rule. Otherwise if
not defined in rule, reimbursement for travel expenses shall be at the rates
allowed by RCW 43.03.050 and 43.03.060.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
112. A new section is added
to chapter 43.23 RCW to read as follows:

The director may
consult with each commodity commission established under state law in order to
establish or maintain an integrated comprehensive regulatory scheme for each
commodity and the agricultural industry in this state as a whole.

Sec. 113. RCW 15.76.150 and 1965
ex.s. c 32 s 2 are each amended to read as follows:

The director shall have
the authority to make allocations from the state fair fund, including
interest income under RCW 43.79A.040, exclusively as follows: Eighty-five
percent to participating agricultural fairs, distributed according to the merit
of such fairs measured by a merit rating to be set up by the director. This
merit rating shall take into account such factors as area and population
served, open and/or youth participation, attendance, gate receipts, number and
type of exhibits, premiums and prizes paid, community support, evidence of
successful achievement of the aims and purposes of the fair, extent of
improvements made to grounds and facilities from year to year, and overall
condition and appearance of grounds and facilities. The remaining fifteen
percent of money in the state fair fund may be used for special assistance to
any participating fair or fairs and for administrative expenses incurred in the
administration of this chapter only, including expenses incurred by the fair
commission as may be approved by the director: PROVIDED, That not more than
five percent of the state fair fund may be used for such expenses.

The division and
payment of funds authorized in this section shall occur at such times as the
director may prescribe.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
114. The following acts or
parts of acts are each repealed:

(1) RCW 16.67.020 (Purpose of chapter) and
1969 c 133 s 19;

(2) RCW 15.44.037 (Reimbursement of election
costs) and 1965 ex.s. c 44 s 8;

(3) RCW 15.44.900 (Purpose of chapter) and
1961 c 11 s 15.44.900; and

(4) RCW 15.28.900 (Preamble) and 1961 c 11 s
15.28.900.

Sec. 115. RCW 15.24.010 and 1989 c
354 s 53 are each amended to read as follows:

As used in this
chapter:

(1)
"Commission" means the Washington ((state)) apple ((advertising))
commission;

(2) "Ship"
means to load apples into a conveyance for transport, except apples being moved
from the orchard where grown to a packing house or warehouse within the
immediate area of production;

(3) "Handler"
means any person who ships or initiates a shipping operation, whether for
himself, herself, or for another;

(4) "Dealer"
means any person who handles, ships, buys, or sells apples, or who acts as
sales or purchasing agent, broker, or factor of apples;

(5)
"Processor" and "processing plant" means every person to
whom and every place to which apples are delivered for drying, dehydrating,
canning, pressing, powdering, extracting, cooking, or for use in producing a
product or manufacturing a manufactured article;

(6) "Processing
apples" means all apples delivered to a processing plant for drying,
dehydrating, canning, pressing, powdering, extracting, cooking, or for use in
producing a product or manufacturing a manufactured article. However,
"processing apples" does not include fresh apples sliced or cut for
raw consumption;

(7) "Fresh
apples" means all apples other than processing apples;

(8)
"Director" means the director of the department of agriculture or his
or her duly authorized representative;

(9) "Grower
district No. 1" includes the counties of Chelan, Okanogan, and Douglas;

(10) "Grower
district No. 2" includes the counties of Kittitas, Yakima, Benton, and
Franklin;

(11) "Grower
district No. 3" includes all counties in the state not included in the
first and second districts;

(12) "Dealer
district No. 1" includes the area of the state north of Interstate 90;

(13) "Dealer
district No. 2" includes the area of the state south of Interstate 90; and

(14) "Executive
officer" includes, but is not limited to, the principal management executive,
sales manager, general manager, or other executive employee of similar
responsibility and authority.

Sec. 116. RCW 15.24.020 and 1989 c
354 s 54 are each amended to read as follows:

There is hereby created
a Washington ((state)) apple ((advertising)) commission to be
thus known and designated. The commission shall be composed of nine practical
apple producers and four practical apple dealers. The director shall be an ex
officio member of the commission without vote.

The nine producer
members shall be citizens and residents of this state, over the age of
twenty-five years, each of whom, either individually or as an executive officer
of a corporation, firm or partnership, is and has been actually engaged in
growing and producing apples within the state of Washington for a period of
five years, currently operates a commercial producing orchard in the district
represented, and has during that period derived a substantial portion of his or
her income therefrom: PROVIDED, That he or she may own and operate
an apple warehouse and pack and store apples grown by others, without being
disqualified, so long as a substantial quantity of the apples handled in such
warehouse are grown by him or her; and he or she may sell apples
grown by himself, herself, and others so long as he or she does
not sell a larger quantity of apples grown by others than those grown by
himself or herself. The four dealer members shall be persons who,
either individually or as executive officers of a corporation, firm,
partnership, association, or cooperative organization, are and have been
actively engaged as dealers in apples within the state of Washington for a
period of five years, and are citizens and residents of this state, and are
engaged as apple dealers in the district represented. The qualifications of
members of the commission as herein set forth must continue during their term
of office.

Sec. 117. RCW 15.24.040 and 1989 c
354 s 56 are each amended to read as follows:

The ((director))
commission shall call a meeting of apple growers, and meetings of apple
dealers in dealer district No. 1 and dealer district No. 2 for the purpose of
nominating their respective members of the commission, when a term is about to
expire, or when a vacancy exists, except as provided in RCW 15.24.050, as
amended, at times and places to be fixed by the commission. ((Said)) The
meetings shall be held not later than February 15th of each year and insofar as
practicable, the ((said)) meetings of the growers shall be held at the
same time and place as the annual meeting of the Washington state horticultural
association, or the annual meeting of any other producer organization which
represents a majority of the state's apple producers, as determined by the
commission, but not while the same is in actual session. Public notice of such
meetings shall be given by the commission in such manner as it may determine:
PROVIDED, That nonreceipt of the notice by any interested person shall not
invalidate the proceedings. Any qualified person may be nominated orally for
such positions at the ((said)) respective meetings. Nominations may
also be made within five days after any such meeting by written petition filed
in the Wenatchee office of the commission, signed by not less than five apple
growers or dealers, as the case may be, residing within the district or within
the subdivision if the nomination is made from a subdivision.

The members of the
commission shall be elected by secret mail ballot under the supervision of the
director: PROVIDED, That in any case where there is but one nomination for a
position, a secret mail ballot shall not be conducted or required and the
director shall certify the candidate to be elected. Grower members of the
commission shall be elected by a majority of the votes cast by the apple
growers in the respective districts or subdivisions thereof, as the case may
be, each grower who operates a commercial producing apple orchard within the
district or subdivision being represented, whether an individual proprietor,
partnership, joint venture, or corporation, being entitled to one vote. As to
bona fide leased or rented orchards, only the lessee-operator, if otherwise
qualified, shall be entitled to vote. An individual commercial orchard
operator, if otherwise qualified, shall be entitled to vote as such, even
though he or she is also a member of a partnership or corporation which
votes for other apple acreage. Dealer members of the commission shall be
elected by a majority of the votes cast by the apple dealers in the respective
districts, each dealer being entitled to one vote. If a nominee does not receive
a majority of the votes on the first ballot, a run-off election shall be held
by mail in a similar manner between the two candidates for such position
receiving the largest number of votes.

Sec. 118. RCW 15.24.050 and 1984 c
287 s 12 are each amended to read as follows:

In the event a position
becomes vacant due to resignation, disqualification, death, or for any other
reason, such position until the next annual meeting shall be filled by vote of
the remaining members of the commission. At such annual meeting a commissioner
shall be elected to fill the balance of the unexpired term.

A majority of the
voting members shall constitute a quorum for the transaction of all business
and the carrying out of the duties of the commission.

Each member of the
commission shall be compensated in accordance with RCW 43.03.230 and shall be
reimbursed for actual travel expenses incurred in carrying out the provisions
of this chapter. Employees of the commission may also be reimbursed for actual
travel expenses when ((out of state)) on official commission business.

Sec. 119. RCW 15.24.070 and 1994 c
134 s 1 are each amended to read as follows:

The Washington ((state))
apple ((advertising)) commission is hereby declared and created a
corporate body. The powers and duties of the commission shall include the
following:

(1) To elect a chair
and such other officers as it deems advisable; and to adopt, rescind, and amend
rules and orders for the exercise of its powers under this chapter, which shall
have the force and effect of the law when not inconsistent with existing laws;

(2) To administer and
enforce the provisions of this chapter, and do all things reasonably necessary
to effectuate the purposes of this chapter;

(3) To employ and at
its pleasure discharge a manager, secretary, agents, attorneys, and employees
as it deems necessary, and to prescribe their duties and powers and fix their
compensation;

(4) To establish
offices and incur expense and enter into contracts and to create such
liabilities as may be reasonable for the proper administration and enforcement
of this chapter. Expenses may include reasonable, prudent use of
promotional hosting to benefit the purposes of this chapter;

(5) To investigate and
prosecute violations of this chapter;

(6) To conduct
scientific research to develop and discover the health, food, therapeutic, and
dietetic value of apples and apple products;

(7) To keep accurate
record of all of its dealings, which shall be open to inspection and audit by
the state auditor;

(8) To sue and be sued,
adopt a corporate seal, and have all of the powers of a corporation;

(9) To expend funds for
commodity-related education, training, and leadership programs as the
commission deems expedient;

(10) To borrow money
and incur indebtedness;

(11) To accept gifts,
grants, conveyances, bequests, and devises, of real or personal property, or
both, in trust or otherwise, and sell, lease, exchange, invest, or expend these
donations or the proceeds, rents, profits, and income from the donations except
as limited by the donor's terms. The commission shall adopt rules to govern
and protect the receipt and expenditure of the proceeds, rents, profits, and
income of all such gifts, grants, conveyances, bequests, and devises. The
authority to make expenditures granted by this subsection includes the
authority to make expenditures to provide scholarships or financial assistance
to persons as defined in RCW 1.16.080 or entities associated with the apple
industry, but is not limited to the authority to make expenditures for such a
purpose; ((and))

(12) To engage in
appropriate fund-raising activities for the purpose of supporting the
activities of the commission authorized by this chapter; and

(13) To retain,
discharge, or contract with, at its pleasure, accountants, marketing agencies,
and other professional consultants as necessary, under procedures for hiring,
discharging, and review as adopted by the commission.

Sec. 120. RCW 15.24.080 and 1961 c
11 s 15.24.080 are each amended to read as follows:

In order to benefit
the people of this state, the state's economy and its general tax revenues, the
commission shall provide for and conduct a comprehensive and extensive
research, advertising, and educational campaign as continuous as the
crop, sales, and market conditions reasonably require. It shall
investigate and ascertain the needs of producers, conditions of the markets,
and extent to which public convenience and necessity require research and
advertising to be conducted.

Sec. 121. RCW 15.24.085 and 1961 c
11 s 15.24.085 are each amended to read as follows:

The restrictive
provisions of chapter 43.78 RCW shall not apply to promotional printing and
literature for the Washington ((state)) apple ((advertising))
commission, the Washington state fruit commission, or the Washington state
dairy products commission.

Sec. 122. RCW 15.24.090 and 1983 c
95 s 1 are each amended to read as follows:

If it appears from
investigation by the commission that the revenue from the assessment levied on
fresh apples under this chapter is too high or is inadequate to
accomplish the purposes of this chapter, the commission shall adopt a
resolution setting forth the necessities of the industry, the extent and
probable cost of the required research, market promotion, and advertising, the
extent of public convenience, interest, and necessity, and probable revenue
from the assessment levied. It shall thereupon decrease or increase the
assessment to a sum determined by the commission to be necessary for those
purposes based upon a rate per one hundred pounds of apples, gross billing
weight, shipped in bulk, container, or any style of package or reasonable
equivalent net product assessment as determined by the commission. However, if
a different rate is determined for any specific variety or for fresh apples
sliced or cut for raw consumption, that different rate must be applied to that
variety or those sliced or cut apples. A decrease or an increase
becomes effective sixty days after the resolution is adopted or on any other
date provided for in the resolution, but shall be first referred by the
commission to a referendum mail ballot by the apple growers of this state
conducted under the supervision of the director and be approved by a majority
of the growers voting on it and also be approved by voting growers who operate
more than fifty percent of the acreage voted in the same election. After the
mail ballot, if favorable to the increase or decrease, the commission
shall nevertheless exercise its independent judgment and discretion as to
whether or not to approve the increase or decrease.

Sec. 123. RCW 15.24.100 and 1967 c
240 s 28 are each amended to read as follows:

There is hereby levied
upon all fresh apples grown annually in this state, and all apples packed as
Washington apples, an assessment of twelve cents on each one hundred pounds
gross billing weight or reasonable equivalent net product assessment
measurement, as determined by the commission, plus such annual decreases
or increases thereof as are imposed pursuant to the provisions of RCW
15.24.090. All moneys collected hereunder shall be expended to effectuate the
purpose and objects of this chapter.

Sec. 124. RCW 15.24.110 and 1967 c
240 s 29 are each amended to read as follows:

The assessments on
fresh apples shall be paid, or provision made therefor satisfactory to the
commission, prior to shipment, and no fresh apples shall be carried,
transported, or shipped by any person or by any carrier, railroad, truck, boat,
or other conveyance until the assessment has been paid or provision made
therefor satisfactory to the commission.

The commission shall by
rule ((or regulation)) prescribe the method of collection, and for that
purpose may require stamps to be known as "Washington apple ((advertising))
stamps" to be purchased from the commission and attached to the
containers, invoices, shipping documents, inspection certificates, releases, or
receiving receipts or tickets. Rule-making procedures conducted under this
section are exempt from the provisions of RCW 43.135.055 when adoption of the
rule or rules is determined by a referendum vote of the persons taxed under
this chapter.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
125. A new section is added
to chapter 15.24 RCW to read as follows:

Rule-making proceedings
conducted under this chapter are exempt from compliance with RCW 34.05.310 and
the provisions of chapter 19.85 RCW, the regulatory fairness act, when the
proposed rule is subject to a referendum.

Sec. 126. RCW 15.24.160 and 1961 c
11 s 15.24.160 are each amended to read as follows:

To maintain and
complement the existing comprehensive regulatory scheme, the commission may
employ, designate as agent, act in concert with, and enter into contracts with
any person, council, or commission, including but not limited to the
director, state agencies such as the Washington state fruit commission and its
successors, statewide horticultural associations, organizations or associations
engaged in tracking the movement and marketing of horticultural products, and
organizations or associations of horticultural growers, for the purpose of
promoting the general welfare of the apple industry and particularly for the
purpose of assisting in the sale and distribution of apples in domestic or
foreign commerce, and expend its funds or such portion thereof as it may deem
necessary or advisable for such purpose and for the purpose of paying its
proportionate share of the cost of any program providing direct or indirect
assistance to the sale and distribution of apples in domestic or foreign
commerce. For such purposes it may employ and pay for legal counsel and contract
and pay for other professional services. Neither the state, nor any member,
agent, or employee of the commission, is liable for the acts of the commission,
or upon its contracts. In any civil or criminal action or proceeding for
violation of any rule of statutory or common law against monopolies or
combinations in restraint of trade, including any action under chapter 19.86
RCW, proof that the act complained of was done in compliance with the
provisions of this chapter, and in furtherance of the purposes and provisions
of this chapter, is a complete defense to such an action or proceeding.

Sec. 127. RCW 15.24.170 and 1975
1st ex.s. c 7 s 37 are each amended to read as follows:

Rules, regulations, and
orders made by the commission shall be filed with the director and published in
a legal newspaper in the cities of Wenatchee and Yakima within five days after
being made, and shall become effective pursuant to the provisions of RCW ((34.05.040))
34.05.380.

Sec. 128. RCW 15.24.800 and 1987 c
6 s 1 are each amended to read as follows:

The legislature hereby
finds that, in order to permit the Washington ((state)) apple ((advertising))
commission to accomplish more efficiently its important public purposes, as
enumerated in chapter 15.24 RCW, it is necessary for the state to assist in
financing a new building for the commission, to be located on Euclid Avenue in
Chelan county, and housing commission offices, warehouse space, and a display
room. The state's assistance shall augment approximately five hundred thousand
dollars in commission funds which will be applied directly to the payment of
the costs of this project. The state's assistance shall be in the amount of
eight hundred thousand dollars, or so much thereof as may be required, to be
provided from the proceeds from the sale and issuance of general obligation
bonds of the state, the principal of and interest on which shall be reimbursed
to the state treasury by the commission from revenues derived from the
assessments levied pursuant to chapter 15.24 RCW and other sources.

Sec. 129. RCW 15.24.802 and 1987 c
6 s 2 are each amended to read as follows:

For the purpose of providing
part of the funds necessary for the Washington ((state)) apple ((advertising))
commission to undertake a capital project consisting of the land acquisition
for, and the design, construction, furnishing, and equipping of, the building
described in RCW 15.24.800, and to pay the administrative costs of such
project, including costs of bond issuance and retirement, salaries and related
costs of officials and employees of the state, and other expenses incidental to
the administration of such project, the state finance committee is authorized
to issue general obligation bonds of the state of Washington in the sum of
eight hundred thousand dollars, or so much thereof as may be required.

Sec. 130. RCW 15.24.806 and 1987 c
6 s 4 are each amended to read as follows:

The proceeds from the
sale of the bonds authorized in RCW 15.24.802, together with all grants,
donations, transferred funds, and all other moneys which the state finance
committee or the Washington ((state)) apple ((advertising))
commission may direct the state treasurer to deposit therein, shall be
deposited in the state building construction account in the state treasury.

Sec. 131. RCW 15.24.808 and 1987 c
6 s 5 are each amended to read as follows:

Subject to legislative
appropriation, all proceeds from the sale of the bonds authorized in RCW
15.24.802 shall be administered and expended by the Washington ((state))
apple ((advertising)) commission exclusively for the purposes specified
in RCW 15.24.802.

Sec. 132. RCW 15.24.812 and 1987 c
6 s 7 are each amended to read as follows:

On or before June 30 of
each year, the state finance committee shall certify to the Washington ((state))
apple ((advertising)) commission the principal and interest payments
determined under RCW 15.24.810, exclusive of deposit interest credit,
attributable to the bonds issued under RCW 15.24.802. On each date on which
any interest or principal and interest payment is due, the commission shall
cause the amount certified by the state finance committee to be due on such
date to be paid out of the commission's general fund to the state treasurer for
deposit into the general fund of the state treasury.

Sec. 133. RCW 15.24.818 and 1987 c
6 s 10 are each amended to read as follows:

The bonds authorized by
RCW 15.24.802 shall be issued only after the treasurer of the Washington ((state))
apple ((advertising)) commission has certified that the net proceeds of
the bonds, together with all money to be made available by the commission for
the purposes described in RCW 15.24.802, shall be sufficient for such purposes;
and also that, based upon the treasurer's estimates of future income from
assessments levied pursuant to chapter 15.24 RCW and other sources, an adequate
balance will be maintained in the commission's general fund to enable the
commission to meet the requirements of RCW 15.24.812 during the life of the
bonds to be issued.

Sec. 134. RCW 15.24.900 and 1961 c
11 s 15.24.900 are each amended to read as follows:

(1)
This chapter is passed:

(((1))) (a)
In the exercise of the police power of the state to assure, through this chapter,
and other chapters, that the apple industry is highly regulated to protect
the public health, to prevent fraudulent practices, to promote the welfare of
the state, and to stabilize and protect the apple industry of the state as a
vital and integral part of its economy for the benefit of all its citizens;

(((2))) (b)
Because the apple crop grown in Washington comprises one of the major
agricultural crops of Washington, and that therefore the business of selling
and distributing such crop and the expanding and protection of its market is of
public interest;

(((3))) (c)
Because it is necessary and expedient to enhance the reputation of Washington
apples in domestic and foreign markets;

(((4))) (d)
Because it is necessary to discover the health giving qualities and food and
dietetic value of Washington apples, and to spread that knowledge throughout
the world in order to increase the consumption of Washington apples;

(((5))) (e)
Because Washington grown apples are handicapped by high freight rates in
competition with eastern and foreign grown apples in the markets of the world,
and this disadvantage can only be overcome by education and advertising;

(((6))) (f)
Because the stabilizing and promotion of the apple industry, the
enlarging of its markets, and the increasing of the consumption of apples are
necessary to assure and increase the payment of taxes to the state and
its subdivisions, to alleviate unemployment within the state, and increase
wages for agricultural labor;

(((7))) (g)
To disseminate information giving the public full knowledge of the manner of
production, the cost and expense thereof, the care taken to produce and sell
only apples of the finest quality, the methods and care used in preparing for
market, and the methods of sale and distribution to increase the amount secured
by the producer therefor, so that they can pay higher wages and pay their
taxes, and by such information to reduce the cost of distribution so that the
spread between the cost to the consumer and the amount received by the producer
will be reduced to the minimum absolutely necessary; and

(((8))) (h)
To protect the general public by educating it in reference to the various
varieties and grades of Washington apples, the time to use and consume each variety,
and the uses to which each variety should be put.

(2) The history,
economy, culture, and future of Washington state's agricultural industry
involves the apple industry. In order to develop and promote apples and apple
products as part of an existing comprehensive scheme to regulate those
products, the legislature declares:

(a) That it is vital
to the continued economic well-being of the citizens of this state and their
general welfare that its apple and apple products be properly promoted by
establishing orderly, fair, sound, efficient, and unhampered marketing,
grading, and standards of and for apples and apple products; and by working to
stabilize the apple industry and by increasing consumption of apples and apple
products within the state, nation, and internationally;

(b) That apple
producers operate within a regulatory environment that imposes burdens on them
for the benefit of society and the citizens of the state and includes
restrictions on marketing autonomy. Those restrictions may impair the
agricultural producer's ability to compete in local, domestic, and foreign
markets;

(c) That it is in
the overriding public interest that support for the apple industry be clearly
expressed, that adequate protection be given to agricultural commodities, uses,
activities, and operations, and that apples and apple products be promoted
individually, as well as part of a comprehensive promotion of the agricultural
industry to:

(i) Enhance the
reputation and image of Washington state's agricultural industry;

(ii) Increase the
sale and use of apples and apple products in local, domestic, and foreign
markets;

(iii) Protect the
public and consumers by correcting any false or misleading information and by
educating the public in reference to the quality, care, and methods used in the
production of apples and apple products, and in reference to the various sizes,
grades, and varieties of apples and the uses to which each should be put;

(iv) Increase the
knowledge of the health-giving qualities and dietetic value of apple products;
and

(v) Support and
engage in programs or activities that benefit the production, handling,
processing, marketing, and uses of apples and apple products;

(d) That the apple
industry is a highly regulated industry and that this chapter and the rules
adopted under it are only one aspect of the regulation of the industry. Other
regulations and restraints applicable to the apple industry include:

(i) Washington
agriculture general provisions, chapter 15.04 RCW;

(ii) Pests and
diseases, chapter 15.08 RCW;

(iii) Standards of
grades and packs, chapter 15.17 RCW;

(iv) Tree fruit
research, chapter 15.26 RCW;

(v) Controlled
atmosphere storage, chapter 15.30 RCW;

(vi) Higher
education in agriculture, chapter 28.30 RCW;

(vii) Department of
agriculture, chapter 43.23 RCW;

(viii) Fertilizers,
minerals, and limes under chapter 15.54 RCW;

(ix) Organic food
products act under chapter 15.86 RCW;

(x) Intrastate
commerce in food, drugs, and cosmetics under chapter 69.04 RCW and rules;

(xi) Horticultural
plants and facilities - inspection and licensing under chapter 15.13 RCW;

(xii) Planting stock
under chapter 15.14 RCW;

(xiii) Washington
pesticide control act under chapter 15.58 RCW;

(xiv) Farm marketing
under chapter 15.64 RCW;

(xv) Insect pests
and plant diseases under chapter 17.24 RCW;

(xvi) Weights and
measures under chapter 19.94 RCW;

(xvii) Agricultural
products - commission merchants, dealers, brokers, buyers, and agents under
chapter 20.01 RCW; and

(xviii) The federal
insecticide, fungicide, and rodenticide act under 7 U.S.C. Sec. 136; and

(e) That this
chapter is in the exercise of the police powers of this state for the purposes
of protecting the health, peace, safety, and general welfare of the people of
this state.

Sec. 135. RCW 15.26.130 and 1969 c
129 s 13 are each amended to read as follows:

The Washington
apple ((advertising)) commission and the Washington state fruit
commission shall supply the director with a list of known producers subject to
paying assessments to the respective commissions. The director, in addition,
shall at the commission's cost compile a list of known tree fruit producers
producing fruit not subject to assessments of the Washington apple ((advertising))
commission and the Washington state fruit commission but subject to assessments
or becoming subject to assessments under the provisions of this chapter. In
compiling such list the director shall publish notice to producers of such tree
fruit, requiring them to file with the director a report giving the producer's
name, mailing address and orchard location. The notice shall be published once
a week for four consecutive weeks in weekly or daily newspapers of general
circulation in the area or areas where such tree fruit is produced. All
producer reports shall be filed with the director within twenty days from the
date of last publication of notice or thirty days of mailing notice to
producers of such tree fruit, whichever is later. The director shall for the
purpose of conducting any referendum affecting tree fruits subject to the
provisions of this chapter keep such list up to date when conducting such
referendum. Every person who becomes a producer after ((said)) the
list is compiled shall file with the director a similar report, giving his or
her name, mailing address and orchard location. Such list shall be final
and conclusive in conducting referendums and failure to notify a producer shall
not be cause for the invalidation of any referendum.

Sec. 136. RCW 15.26.250 and 1969 c
129 s 25 are each amended to read as follows:

The Washington
apple ((advertising)) commission and Washington state fruit commission
in order to avoid unnecessary duplication of costs and efforts in collecting
assessments for tree fruits at the time said commissions collect assessments
due under the provisions of their acts may also collect the assessment due the
commission on such tree fruit. Such assessments on winter pears may be
collected by the Washington state fruit commission or in a manner prescribed by
the commission. Assessments collected for the commission by the Washington ((state))
apple ((advertising)) commission and the Washington state fruit
commission shall be forwarded to the commissions expeditiously. No fee shall
be charged the commission for the collection of assessments because the
research conducted by the commission shall be of direct benefit to all
commercial growers of tree fruits in the state of Washington((: PROVIDED,
That)). However, the commission shall reimburse at actual cost to
the department or the Washington state fruit commission or apple commission any
assessment collected for the commission by such agencies for any tree fruit
subject to the provisions of this chapter, but not subject to pay assessments
to the Washington state fruit commission or the Washington apple ((advertising))
commission.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 137. This act takes effect
July 1, 2002.

---
END ---