BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF
WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1. RCW 81.112.030 and 1994
c 44 s 1 are each amended to read as follows:

Two or more contiguous
counties each having a population of four hundred thousand persons or more may
establish a regional transit authority to develop and operate a high capacity
transportation system as defined in chapter 81.104 RCW.

The authority shall be
formed in the following manner:

(1) The joint regional
policy committee created pursuant to RCW 81.104.040 shall adopt a system and
financing plan, including the definition of the service area. This action
shall be completed by September 1, 1992, contingent upon satisfactory
completion of the planning process defined in RCW 81.104.100. The final system
plan shall be adopted no later than June 30, 1993. In addition to the
requirements of RCW 81.104.100, the plan for the proposed system shall provide
explicitly for a minimum portion of new tax revenues to be allocated to local
transit agencies for interim express services. Upon adoption the joint
regional policy committee shall immediately transmit the plan to the county
legislative authorities within the adopted service area.

(2) The legislative
authorities of the counties within the service area shall decide by resolution
whether to participate in the authority. This action shall be completed within
forty-five days following receipt of the adopted plan or by August 13, 1993, whichever
comes first.

(3) Each county that
chooses to participate in the authority shall appoint its initial board
members as set forth in RCW 81.112.040 and shall submit its list of members to
the secretary of the Washington state department of transportation. These
actions must be completed within thirty days following each county's decision
to participate in the authority.

(4) The secretary shall
call the first meeting of the authority, to be held within thirty days
following receipt of the appointments. At its first meeting, the authority
shall elect officers and provide for the adoption of rules and other operating
procedures.

(5) The authority is
formally constituted at its first meeting and the board shall begin taking
steps toward implementation of the system and financing plan adopted by the
joint regional policy committee. If the joint regional policy committee fails
to adopt a plan by June 30, 1993, the authority shall proceed to do so based on
the work completed by that date by the joint regional policy committee. Upon
formation of the authority, the joint regional policy committee shall cease to
exist. The authority may make minor modifications to the plan as deemed
necessary and shall at a minimum review local transit agencies' plans to ensure
feeder service/high capacity transit service integration, ensure fare
integration, and ensure avoidance of parallel competitive services. The
authority shall also conduct a minimum thirty-day public comment period.

(6) If the authority
determines that major modifications to the plan are necessary before the
initial ballot proposition is submitted to the voters, the authority may make
those modifications with a favorable vote of two-thirds of the entire
membership. Any such modification shall be subject to the review process set
forth in RCW 81.104.110. The modified plan shall be transmitted to the
legislative authorities of the participating counties. The legislative
authorities shall have forty-five days following receipt to act by motion or ordinance
to confirm or rescind their continued participation in the authority.

(7) If any county opts
to not participate in the authority, but two or more contiguous counties do
choose to continue to participate, the authority's board shall be revised accordingly.
The authority shall, within forty-five days, redefine the system and financing
plan to reflect elimination of one or more counties, and submit the redefined
plan to the legislative authorities of the remaining counties for their
decision as to whether to continue to participate. This action shall be
completed within forty-five days following receipt of the redefined plan.

(8) The authority shall
place on the ballot within two years of the authority's formation, a single
ballot proposition to authorize the imposition of taxes to support the
implementation of an appropriate phase of the plan within its service area. In
addition to the system plan requirements contained in RCW 81.104.100(2)(d), the
system plan approved by the authority's board before the submittal of a
proposition to the voters shall contain an equity element which:

(a) Identifies revenues
anticipated to be generated by corridor and by county within the authority's
boundaries;

(b) Identifies the
phasing of construction and operation of high capacity system facilities,
services, and benefits in each corridor. Phasing decisions should give
priority to jurisdictions which have adopted transit-supportive land use plans;
and

(c) Identifies the
degree to which revenues generated within each county will benefit the
residents of that county, and identifies when such benefits will accrue.

A simple majority of
those voting within the boundaries of the authority is required for approval.
If the vote is affirmative, the authority shall begin implementation of the
projects identified in the proposition. However, the authority may not submit
any authorizing proposition for voter-approved taxes prior to July 1, 1993; nor
may the authority issue bonds or form any local improvement district prior to
July 1, 1993.

(9) If the vote on a
proposition fails, the board may redefine the proposition, make changes to the
authority boundaries, and make corresponding changes to the composition of the
board. If the composition of the board is changed, the participating counties
shall revise the membership of the board accordingly. The board may then
submit the revised proposition or a different proposition to the voters. No
single proposition may be submitted to the voters more than twice. The
authority may place additional propositions on the ballot to impose taxes to
support additional phases of plan implementation.

If the authority is
unable to achieve a positive vote on a proposition within two years from the
date of the first election on a proposition, the board may, by resolution,
reconstitute the authority as a single-county body. With a two-thirds vote of
the entire membership of the voting members, the board may also dissolve the
authority.

Sec. 2. RCW 81.112.040 and 1994
c 109 s 1 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) ((The regional
transit authority shall be governed by a board consisting of representatives
appointed by the county executive and confirmed by the council or other
legislative authority of each member county. Membership shall be based on
population from that portion of each county which lies within the service
area. Board members shall be appointed initially on the basis of one for each
one hundred forty-five thousand population within the county. Such
appointments shall be made following consultation with city and town
jurisdictions within the service area. In addition, the secretary of
transportation or the secretary's designee shall serve as a member of the board
and may have voting status with approval of a majority of the other members of
the board. Only board members, not including alternates or designees, may cast
votes.

Each member of the
board, except the secretary of transportation or the secretary's designee,
shall be:

(a) An elected official
who serves on the legislative authority of a city or as mayor of a city within
the boundaries of the authority;

(b) On the
legislative authority of the county, if fifty percent of the population of the
legislative official's district is within the authority boundaries; or

(c) A county
executive from a member county within the authority boundaries.

When making
appointments, each county executive shall ensure that representation on the
board includes an elected city official representing the largest city in each
county and assures proportional representation from other cities, and
representation from unincorporated areas of each county within the service
area. At least one-half of all appointees from each county shall serve on the
governing authority of a public transportation system.

Members appointed
from each county shall serve staggered four-year terms. Vacancies shall be
filled by appointment for the remainder of the unexpired term of the position
being vacated.

The governing board
shall be reconstituted, with regard to the number of representatives from each
county, on a population basis, using the official office of financial
management population estimates, five years after its initial formation and, at
minimum, in the year following each official federal census. The board
membership may be reduced, maintained, or expanded to reflect population
changes but under no circumstances may the board membership exceed twenty-five.)) Board members will be elected as described
in section 3 of this act.

(2) Major decisions of
the authority ((shall)) require a favorable vote of two-thirds of the
entire membership of the voting members. "Major decisions" include
at least the following: System plan adoption and amendment; system phasing
decisions; annual budget adoption; authorization of annexations; modification
of board composition; and executive director employment.

(3) Each member of the
board is eligible to be reimbursed for travel expenses in accordance with RCW
43.03.050 and 43.03.060 ((and to receive compensation as provided in RCW
43.03.250)).

NEW SECTION. Sec.
3. A new section is added
to chapter 81.112 RCW to read as follows:

(1) The regional
transit authority will be governed by an elected board consisting of members
elected from member districts. Districts must have approximately equal
population, and are created under subsection (4) of this section.

(2) The election
officials of the county or counties in which the district is located shall
conduct the election in accordance with the election laws of the state. Board
districts will be used as follows: (a) Only a registered voter who resides in
a district may be a candidate for, or serve as, a board member of the board
district; and (b) only voters of a board district may vote at a primary to
nominate candidates or at a general election for a board member of the board
district.

(3) Board members will
be elected on a nonpartisan basis to serve staggered, four-year terms of
office. Initial terms will be established under subsection (4) of this
section. Vacancies will be filled by appointment by the legislative authority
of the county in which the board district is primarily located.

(4) The current
governing board shall reconstitute the new board as follows:

(a) Set a date for the
initial election of board members no later than the November 2002 general
election;

(b) Create either nine
or eleven board districts based on proportional population;

(c) Determine board
member part-time salaries and account for the salaries in the budget of the
authority; and

(d) Establish initial
terms of office to ensure that member terms are staggered.

(5) Elected board
members shall take office on the second Monday of odd-numbered years.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 4. Sections 1 and 3 of this
act are necessary for the immediate preservation of the public peace, health,
or safety, or support of the state government and its existing public
institutions, and take effect immediately. Section 2 of this act takes effect
January 13, 2003.

---
END ---