BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF
WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec.
1. (1) The legislature finds
that:

(a) Each year, over
three hundred thousand women are sexually assaulted in the United States;

(b) Nationally, over
thirty-two thousand women become pregnant each year as a result of sexual
assault. Approximately fifty percent of these pregnancies end in abortion;

(c) Approximately
thirty-eight percent of women in Washington are sexually assaulted over the
course of their lifetime. This is twenty percent more than the national
average;

(d) Only fifteen
percent of sexual assaults in Washington are reported; however, even the
numbers of reported attacks are staggering. For example, last year, two
thousand six hundred fifty-nine rapes were reported in Washington, this is more
than seven rapes per day.

(2) The legislature
deems it essential that all hospital emergency rooms provide emergency
contraception as a treatment option to any woman who seeks treatment as a
result of a sexual assault.

Sec. 2. RCW 70.41.020 and 1991 c
3 s 334 are each amended to read as follows:

Unless the context
clearly indicates otherwise, the following terms, whenever used in this
chapter, shall be deemed to have the following meanings:

(1)
"Department" means the Washington state department of health((;)).

(2) "Emergency
care to victims of sexual assault" means medical examinations, procedures,
and services provided by a hospital emergency room to a victim of sexual
assault following an alleged sexual assault.

(3) "Emergency
contraception" means any health care treatment approved by the food and
drug administration that prevents pregnancy, including but not limited to
administering two increased doses of certain oral contraceptive pills within
seventy-two hours of sexual contact.

(4)
"Hospital" means any institution, place, building, or agency which
provides accommodations, facilities and services over a continuous period of
twenty-four hours or more, for observation, diagnosis, or care, of two or more
individuals not related to the operator who are suffering from illness, injury,
deformity, or abnormality, or from any other condition for which obstetrical,
medical, or surgical services would be appropriate for care or diagnosis.
"Hospital" as used in this chapter does not include hotels, or
similar places furnishing only food and lodging, or simply domiciliary care;
nor does it include clinics, or physician's offices where patients are not
regularly kept as bed patients for twenty-four hours or more; nor does it
include nursing homes, as defined and which come within the scope of chapter
18.51 RCW; nor does it include ((maternity homes)) birthing centers,
which come within the scope of chapter 18.46 RCW; nor does it include
psychiatric hospitals, which come within the scope of chapter 71.12 RCW; nor
any other hospital, or institution specifically intended for use in the
diagnosis and care of those suffering from mental illness, mental retardation,
convulsive disorders, or other abnormal mental condition. Furthermore, nothing
in this chapter or the rules adopted pursuant thereto shall be construed as
authorizing the supervision, regulation, or control of the remedial care or
treatment of residents or patients in any hospital conducted for those who rely
primarily upon treatment by prayer or spiritual means in accordance with the
creed or tenets of any well recognized church or religious denominations((;)).

(((3))) (5)
"Person" means any individual, firm, partnership, corporation,
company, association, or joint stock association, and the legal successor
thereof.

(6)
"Secretary" means the secretary of health.

(7) "Sexual
assault" has the same meaning as in RCW 70.125.030.

(8) "Victim of
sexual assault" means a person who alleges or is alleged to have been
sexually assaulted and who presents as a patient.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
3. A new section is added
to chapter 70.41 RCW to read as follows:

(1) Every hospital
providing emergency care to a victim of sexual assault shall:

(a) Provide the victim
with medically and factually accurate and unbiased written and oral information
about emergency contraception;

(b) Orally inform each
victim of sexual assault of her option to be provided emergency contraception
at the hospital; and

(c) If not medically
contraindicated, provide emergency contraception immediately at the hospital to
each victim of sexual assault who requests it.

(2) The secretary, in
collaboration with community sexual assault programs and other relevant
stakeholders, shall develop, prepare, and produce informational materials
relating to emergency contraception for distribution to and use in all
emergency rooms in the state, in quantities sufficient to comply with the
requirements of this section. The secretary, in collaboration with community
sexual assault programs and other relevant stakeholders, may also approve
informational materials from other sources for the purposes of this section.
The informational materials must be clearly written and readily comprehensible
in a culturally competent manner, as the secretary, in collaboration with
community sexual assault programs and other relevant stakeholders, deems
necessary to inform victims of sexual assault. The materials must explain the
nature of emergency contraception, including that it is effective in preventing
pregnancy, treatment options, and where they can be obtained.

(3) The secretary shall
adopt rules necessary to implement this section.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
4. A new section is added
to chapter 70.41 RCW to read as follows:

The
department must respond to complaints of violations of section 3 of this act.
The department shall convene a task force, composed of representatives from
community sexual assault programs and other relevant stakeholders including
advocacy agencies, medical agencies, and hospital associations, to provide
input into the development and evaluation of the education materials and rule
development. The task force shall expire on January 1, 2004.

---
END ---