BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF
WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1. RCW 35.21.217 and 1998 c
285 s 1 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) Prior to furnishing
utility services, a city or town may require a deposit to guarantee payment for
services. However, failure to require a deposit does not affect the validity
of any lien authorized by RCW 35.21.290 or 35.67.200. A city or town may
determine how to apply partial payments on past due accounts.

(2) A city or town may provide
a real property owner or the owner's designee with duplicates of tenant utility
service bills, or may notify an owner or the owner's designee that a tenant's
utility account is delinquent. However, if an owner or the owner's designee
notifies the city or town in writing that a property served by the city or town
is a rental property, asks to be notified of a tenant's delinquency, and has
provided, in writing, a complete and accurate mailing address, the city or town
shall notify the owner or the owner's designee of a tenant's delinquency at the
same time and in the same manner the city or town notifies the tenant of the
tenant's delinquency or by mail. When a city or town provides a real property
owner or the owner's designee with duplicates of tenant utility service bills
or notice that a tenant's utility account is delinquent, the city or town shall
notify the tenant that it is providing the duplicate bills or delinquency
notice to the owner or the owner's designee. After January 1, 1999, if a city
or town fails to notify the owner of a tenant's delinquency after receiving a
written request to do so and after receiving the other information required by
this subsection, the city or town shall have no lien against the premises for
the tenant's delinquent and unpaid charges.

(3) After January 1,
2003, a city or town may not collect from the property owner in any manner for
more than four months of a tenant's delinquent and unpaid utility charges for
water or electric utility services if the city or town has received a written
request for notice of delinquency from the property owner and has received all
other information required under this section. If, as of the effective date of
this act, a city or town bills customers for providing water or electric
utility service on a cycle of once every two months, the total delinquent
tenant charges that a city or town may collect in any manner from the property
owner shall not exceed six months of a tenant's delinquent and unpaid utility
charges.

Sec. 2. RCW 35.21.300 and 1995 c
399 s 36 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) The lien for
charges for service by a city waterworks, or electric light or power plant,
may be enforced only by cutting off the service until the delinquent and unpaid
charges are paid((, except that)). However, until June 30, 1991,
utility service for residential space heating may be terminated between
November 15 and March 15 only as provided in subsections (2) and (4) of this
section and, after January 1, 2003, unpaid utility charges for services
provided to a tenant may be collected from the property owner only as provided
in RCW 35.21.217(3). In the event of a disputed account and tender by the
owner of the premises of the amount the owner claims to be due before the
service is cut off, the right to refuse service to any premises shall not
accrue until suit has been entered by the city and judgment entered in the
case.

(2) Utility service for
residential space heating shall not be terminated between November 15 through
March 15 if the customer:

(a) Notifies the
utility of the inability to pay the bill, including a security deposit. This
notice should be provided within five business days of receiving a payment
overdue notice unless there are extenuating circumstances. If the customer
fails to notify the utility within five business days and service is
terminated, the customer can, by paying reconnection charges, if any, and
fulfilling the requirements of this section, receive the protections of this
chapter;

(b) Provides
self-certification of household income for the prior twelve months to a grantee
of the department of community, trade, and economic development which
administers federally funded energy assistance programs. The grantee shall
determine that the household income does not exceed the maximum allowed for
eligibility under the state's plan for low-income energy assistance under 42
U.S.C. 8624 and shall provide a dollar figure that is seven percent of
household income. The grantee may verify information in the
self-certification;

(c) Has applied for
home heating assistance from applicable government and private sector
organizations and certifies that any assistance received will be applied to the
current bill and future utility bills;

(d) Has applied for
low-income weatherization assistance to the utility or other appropriate agency
if such assistance is available for the dwelling;

(e) Agrees to a payment
plan and agrees to maintain the payment plan. The plan will be designed both
to pay the past due bill by the following October 15 and to pay for continued
utility service. If the past due bill is not paid by the following October 15,
the customer shall not be eligible for protections under this chapter until the
past due bill is paid. The plan shall not require monthly payments in excess
of seven percent of the customer's monthly income plus one-twelfth of any
arrearage accrued from the date application is made and thereafter during
November 15 through March 15. A customer may agree to pay a higher percentage
during this period, but shall not be in default unless payment during this
period is less than seven percent of monthly income plus one-twelfth of any
arrearage accrued from the date application is made and thereafter. If
assistance payments are received by the customer subsequent to implementation
of the plan, the customer shall contact the utility to reformulate the plan;
and

(f) Agrees to pay the
moneys owed even if he or she moves.

(3) The utility shall:

(a) Include in any
notice that an account is delinquent and that service may be subject to
termination, a description of the customer's duties in this section;

(b) Assist the customer
in fulfilling the requirements under this section;

(c) Be authorized to
transfer an account to a new residence when a customer who has established a
plan under this section moves from one residence to another within the same
utility service area;

(d) Be permitted to
disconnect service if the customer fails to honor the payment program.
Utilities may continue to disconnect service for those practices authorized by
law other than for nonpayment as provided for in this section. Customers who
qualify for payment plans under this section who default on their payment plans
and are disconnected can be reconnected and maintain the protections afforded
under this chapter by paying reconnection charges, if any, and by paying all
amounts that would have been due and owing under the terms of the applicable
payment plan, absent default, on the date on which service is reconnected; and

(e) Advise the customer
in writing at the time it disconnects service that it will restore service if
the customer contacts the utility and fulfills the other requirements of this
section.

(4) All municipal
utilities shall offer residential customers the option of a budget billing or
equal payment plan. The budget billing or equal payment plan shall be offered
low-income customers eligible under the state's plan for low-income energy
assistance prepared in accordance with 42 U.S.C. 8624(C)(1) without limiting
availability to certain months of the year, without regard to the length of
time the customer has occupied the premises, and without regard to whether the
customer is the tenant or owner of the premises occupied.

(5) An
agreement between the customer and the utility, whether oral or written, shall
not waive the protections afforded under this chapter.

---
END ---