BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF
WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1. RCW 46.94.010 and 1985 c
472 s 3 are each amended to read as follows:

As used in this
chapter:

(1)
"Department" means the department of licensing.

(2) "Designated
family member" means (a) an heir as defined in RCW 11.02.005(6) if the
motorcycle dealer dies intestate or (b) a legatee or devisee as used in Title
11 RCW if the deceased motorcycle dealer leaves a will. A motorcycle
dealer also may name in a notarized statement any person as the designated
family member for the purposes of receiving an interest in the motorcycle
dealership. Title 11 RCW applies to this chapter. However, in cases of
conflict, the notarized inter vivos designation prevails over testamentary and
intestate succession. Notarized inter vivos designations under this subsection
are not codicils to wills.

(3)
"Distributor" means a person, whether a resident or nonresident,
other than a manufacturer, who sells, leases, or distributes motorcycles to
motorcycle dealers, or controls any other person, other than a manufacturer,
who sells, leases, or distributes motorcycles to motorcycle dealers.

(4) "Distributor
branch" means a branch office maintained by the distributor or wholesaler.

(5) "Distributor
representative" means a representative employed by a distributor or
wholesaler for the purpose of selling or promoting the sale or lease of the
distributor's or wholesaler's motorcycles to motorcycle dealers, or for the
purpose of supervising or contacting dealers.

(6) "Factory
branch" means a branch office maintained by a manufacturer in order to
direct and supervise the representatives of the manufacturer.

(7) "Factory
representative" means a person employed by a manufacturer for the purpose
of making or promoting the sale or lease of the manufacturer's motorcycles to
dealers, distributors, or prospective motorcycle dealers.

(8)
"Franchise" means an oral or written contract, to include a dealer
agreement, either expressed or implied, between a franchisor and a motorcycle
dealer which purports to fix the legal rights and liabilities between the
parties and under which (a) the dealer is granted the right to purchase and
resell motorcycles manufactured, distributed, or imported by the franchisor;
(b) the dealer's business is associated with the trademark, trade name,
commercial symbol, or advertisement designating the franchisor or the products
distributed by the franchisor; and (c) the dealer's business relies on the
franchisor for a continued supply of motorcycles, parts, and accessories.

(9)
"Franchisor" means any person who enters into a franchise with a
motorcycle dealer.

(10)
"Manufacturer" means any person, firm, association, corporation, or
trust that manufactures or provides assemblies for motorcycles.

(11)
"Motorcycle" means any motor vehicle which has an unladen weight of
less than fifteen hundred pounds, including any parts, accessories, equipment,
or special tools designated or intended for use on or with those motor
vehicles, and (a) which is self-propelled and capable of use and operation on
the public highways and streets; or (b) which is a self-propelled, off-road
vehicle, tired or nontired, capable of transporting individuals on or off
public highways and streets. "Motorcycle" excludes farm tractors,
golf carts, firefighting equipment, any motor vehicle designed solely for
industrial purposes, and lawnmowers.

(12) "Motorcycle
dealer" or "dealer" means a person operating under a dealer
agreement or franchise with a franchisor who is engaged regularly in the
business of buying, selling, exchanging, offering, brokering, or leasing with
an option to purchase new or used motorcycles in the state, with a place of
business in the state.

(13) "New
motorcycle" means a motorcycle that has been sold or transferred to a
motorcycle dealer and that has not been used for other than demonstration
purposes, and on which the original title has not been issued from the
motorcycle dealer. The term includes motorcycles not of the current model year
comprising part of the dealer's inventory.

(14) "Person"
means any natural person, partnership, stock company, corporation, trust,
agency, or other legal entity, as well as any individual officers, directors,
or other persons in active control of the activities of the entity.

(15) "Place of
business" means a permanent, enclosed commercial building, situated within
the state, and the real property on which it is located, at which the business
of a motorcycle dealer, including the display and repair of motorcycles, may be
lawfully conducted in accordance with the terms of all applicable laws and in
the building the public may contact the motorcycle dealer or his or her
employees at all reasonable times.

(16) "Relevant
market area" ((means a ten-mile radius around a proposed place of
business)) is defined as follows:

(a) If the
population in the county in which the proposed new or relocated dealership is
to be located is four hundred thousand or more, the relevant market area is the
geographic area within a radius of eight miles around the proposed site;

(b) If the
population in the county in which the proposed new or relocated dealership is
to be located is two hundred thousand or more and less than four hundred
thousand, the relevant market area is the geographic area within a radius of
twelve miles around the proposed site;

(c) If the
population in the county in which the proposed new or relocated dealership is
to be located is less than two hundred thousand, the relevant market area is
the geographic area within a radius of sixteen miles around the proposed site.

In determining
population for this definition, the most recent census by the United States
Bureau of Census or the most recent population update, either from the National
Planning Data Corporation or other similar recognized source, will be
accumulated for all census tracts either wholly or partially within the relevant
market area.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
2. A new section is added
to chapter 46.94 RCW to read as follows:

Notwithstanding the
terms of a franchise and notwithstanding the terms of a waiver, if a
manufacturer intends or proposes to enter into a franchise to establish an
additional new motorcycle dealer or to relocate an existing new motorcycle
dealer within or into a relevant market area in which the same line make of
motorcycle is then represented, the manufacturer shall provide at least sixty
days advance written notice to the department and to each new motorcycle dealer
of the same line make in the relevant market area, of the manufacturer's
intention to establish an additional new motorcycle dealer or to relocate an
existing new motorcycle dealer within or into the relevant market area. The
notice must be sent by certified mail to each such party and must include the
following information:

(1) The specific
location at which the additional or relocated motorcycle dealer will be
established;

(2) The date on or
after which the additional or relocated motorcycle dealer intends to commence
business at the proposed location;

(3) The identity of all
motorcycle dealers who are franchised to sell the same line make motorcycles as
the proposed dealer and who have licensed locations within the relevant market
area;

(4) The names and
addresses, if available, of the owners of and principal investors in the
proposed additional or relocated motorcycle dealership; and

(5) The specific
grounds or reasons for the proposed establishment of an additional motorcycle
dealer or relocation of an existing dealer.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
3. A new section is added
to chapter 46.94 RCW to read as follows:

(1) Within thirty days
after receipt of the notice under section 2 of this act, or within thirty days
after the end of an appeal procedure provided by the manufacturer, whichever is
greater, a new motorcycle dealer so notified or entitled to notice may file a
petition with the department protesting the proposed establishment or
relocation. The petition must contain a short statement setting forth the reasons
for the dealer's objection to the proposed establishment or relocation. Upon
the filing of a protest and the receipt of the filing fee, the department shall
promptly notify the manufacturer that a timely protest has been filed and shall
request the appointment of an administrative law judge under chapter 34.12 RCW
to conduct a hearing. The manufacturer shall not establish or relocate the new
motorcycle dealer until the administrative law judge has held a hearing and has
determined that there is good cause for permitting the proposed establishment
or relocation. When more than one protest is filed against the establishment
or relocation of the same dealer, the administrative law judge shall
consolidate the hearings to expedite disposition of the matter.

(2) If a manufacturer
provides in the franchise agreement or by written statement distributed and
provided to its dealers for arbitration under the Washington Arbitration Act,
chapter 7.04 RCW, as a mechanism for resolving disputes relating to the establishment
of an additional new motorcycle dealer or the relocation of a new motorcycle
dealer, then the provisions of this section and RCW 46.96.170 relating to
hearings by an administrative law judge do not apply, and a dispute regarding
the establishment of an additional new motorcycle dealer or the relocation of
an existing new motorcycle dealer must be determined in an arbitration
proceeding conducted in accordance with the Washington Arbitration Act, chapter
7.04 RCW. The thirty-day period for filing a protest under this section still
applies except that the protesting dealer shall file the protest with the
manufacturer within thirty days after receipt of the notice under section 2 of
this act.

(3) The dispute will be
referred for arbitration to such arbitrator as may be agreed upon by the
parties to the dispute. If the parties cannot agree upon a single arbitrator
within thirty days from the date the protest is filed, the protesting dealer
will select an arbitrator, the manufacturer will select an arbitrator, and the
two arbitrators will then select a third. If a third arbitrator is not agreed
upon within thirty days, any party may apply to the superior court, and the
judge of the superior court having jurisdiction will appoint the third
arbitrator. The protesting dealer will pay the arbitrator selected by him or
her, and the manufacturer will pay the arbitrator it selected. The expense of
the third arbitrator and all other expenses of arbitration will be shared
equally by the parties. Attorneys' fees and fees paid to expert witnesses are
not expenses of arbitration and will be paid by the person incurring them.

(4) Notwithstanding the
terms of a franchise or written statement of the manufacturer and
notwithstanding the terms of a waiver, the arbitration will take place in the
state of Washington in the county where the protesting dealer has his or her
principal place of business. Section 4 of this act applies to a determination
made by the arbitrator or arbitrators in determining whether good cause exists
for permitting the proposed establishment or relocation of a new motorcycle
dealer, and the manufacturer has the burden of proof to establish that good
cause exists for permitting the proposed establishment or relocation. After a
hearing has been held, the arbitrator or arbitrators shall render a decision as
expeditiously as possible, but in any event not later than one hundred twenty
days from the date the arbitrator or arbitrators are selected or appointed.
The manufacturer shall not establish or relocate the new motorcycle dealer
until the arbitration hearing has been held and the arbitrator or arbitrators
have determined that there is good cause for permitting the proposed
establishment or relocation. The written decision of the arbitrator is binding
upon the parties unless modified, corrected, or vacated under the Washington
Arbitration Act. Any party may appeal the decision of the arbitrator under the
Washington Arbitration Act, chapter 7.04 RCW.

(5) If the franchise
agreement or the manufacturer's written statement distributed and provided to
its dealers does not provide for arbitration under the Washington Arbitration
Act as a mechanism for resolving disputes relating to the establishment of an
additional new motorcycle dealer or the relocation of a new motorcycle dealer,
then the hearing provisions of this section and section 5 of this act apply.
Nothing in this section is intended to preclude a new motorcycle dealer from
electing to use any other dispute resolution mechanism offered by a manufacturer.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
4. A new section is added
to chapter 46.94 RCW to read as follows:

In determining whether
good cause exists for permitting the proposed establishment or relocation of a
new motorcycle dealer of the same line make, the administrative law judge shall
take into consideration the existing circumstances, including, but not limited
to:

(1) The extent, nature,
and permanency of the investment of both the existing motorcycle dealers of the
same line make in the relevant market area and the proposed additional or
relocating new motorcycle dealer, including obligations reasonably incurred by
the existing dealers to perform their obligations under their respective
franchises;

(2) The growth or
decline in population and new motorcycle registrations during the past five
years in the relevant market area;

(3) The effect on the
consuming public in the relevant market area;

(4) The effect on the
existing new motorcycle dealers in the relevant market area, including any
adverse financial impact;

(5) The reasonably
expected or anticipated motorcycle market for the relevant market area,
including demographic factors such as age of population, income, education,
size class preference, product popularity, retail lease transactions, or other
factors affecting sales to consumers in the relevant market area;

(6) Whether it is
injurious or beneficial to the public welfare for an additional new motorcycle
dealer to be established;

(7) Whether the new
motorcycle dealers of the same line make in the relevant market area are
providing adequate competition and convenient customer care for the motorcycles
of the same line make in the relevant market area, including the adequacy of
motorcycle sales and service facilities, equipment, supply of parts, and
qualified service personnel;

(8) Whether the
establishment of an additional new motorcycle dealer would increase competition
and be in the public interest;

(9) Whether the
manufacturer is motivated principally by good faith to establish an additional
or new motorcycle dealer and not by noneconomic considerations;

(10) Whether the
manufacturer has denied its existing new motorcycle dealers of the same line
make the opportunity for reasonable growth, market expansion, establishment of
a subagency, or relocation;

(11) Whether the
protesting dealer or dealers are in substantial compliance with their dealer
agreements or franchises; and

(12) Whether the
manufacturer has complied with the requirements of sections 2 and 3 of this act.

In considering the
factors set forth in this section, the administrative law judge shall give the
factors equal weight, and in making a determination as to whether good cause
exists for permitting the proposed establishment or relocation of a new motorcycle
dealer of the same line make, the administrative law judge must find that at
least nine of the factors set forth in this section weigh in favor of the
manufacturer and in favor of the proposed establishment or relocation of a new
motorcycle dealer.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
5. A new section is added
to chapter 46.94 RCW to read as follows:

(1) The manufacturer
has the burden of proof to establish that good cause exists for permitting the
proposed establishment or relocation.

(2) The administrative
law judge shall conduct any hearing as provided in RCW 46.96.050(2), and all
hearing costs will be borne as provided in that subsection. The administrative
law judge shall render the final decision as expeditiously as possible, but in
any event not later than one hundred twenty days after a protest is filed. If
more than one protest is filed, the one hundred twenty days commences to run
from the date the last protest is filed. A party to such a hearing aggrieved
by the final order of the administrative law judge may appeal as provided and
allowed in RCW 46.96.050(3).

NEW SECTION. Sec.
6. A new section is added
to chapter 46.94 RCW to read as follows:

Sections 2 through 5 of
this act do not apply:

(1) To the sale or
transfer of the ownership or assets of an existing new motorcycle dealer where
the transferee proposes to engage in business representing the same line make
at the same location or within two miles of that location;

(2) To the relocation of
an existing new motorcycle dealer within the dealer's relevant market area if
the relocation is not at a site within eight miles of any new motorcycle dealer
of the same line make;

(3) If the proposed new
motorcycle dealer is to be established at or within two miles of a location at
which a former new motorcycle dealer of the same line make had ceased operating
within the previous twenty-four months;

(4) Where the proposed
relocation is two miles or less from the existing location of the relocating
new motorcycle dealer; or

(5) Where
the proposed relocation is to be further away from all other existing new
motorcycle dealers of the same line make in the relevant market area.

---
END ---