BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF
WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec.
1. A new section is added
to chapter 81.40 RCW to read as follows:

(1) Any time a railroad
company employee determines that he or she is fatigued and unable to safely
perform his or her duties, that employee must be allowed to absence himself or
herself from service to the company without any intimidation, retribution, or
negative notation to his or her employment record.

(2) The
commission may require any railroad company in violation of subsection (1) of
this section to forfeit not less than twenty-five dollars or more than one
hundred dollars for a first offense; not less than one hundred dollars or more
than five hundred dollars for a second offense committed within three years of
the first offense; and not less than five hundred dollars or more than one
thousand dollars for a third offense and each additional offense committed
within three years of the prior offense. All fines shall be deposited in the
transportation fund.

--- END ---