BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF
WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec.
1. (1) The legislature
recognizes that instant runoff voting may be a method to increase voter
interest and participation while maintaining clean elections. Therefore, the
house of representatives and the senate shall convene a workgroup to evaluate a
method of elections known as instant runoff voting. The efforts of the
workgroup shall include:

(a) An analysis of
instant runoff voting;

(b) An analysis of the
efforts in other states;

(c) An analysis of the
estimated cost of instant runoff voting to the state and to local governments;

(d) A discussion of
recommendations regarding instant runoff voting, including issues upon which
the workgroup can agree and those that remain in dispute; and

(e) Any other issues
materially related to instant runoff voting identified by the workgroup during
its deliberations.

(2) The workgroup shall
consist of eight members. Four members shall be from the senate, two from each
caucus to be appointed by the president of the senate, and four members shall
be from the house of representatives, two from each caucus to be appointed by
the speaker of the house of representatives. The workgroup shall solicit input
from other agencies and organizations, to include but not be limited to the
office of the secretary of state, the office of community development, the
Washington association of county officials, and the league of women voters.

(3) The
members of the legislature appointed to the workgroup shall be paid by the
legislature under chapter 44.04 RCW. Support staff for the workgroup shall be
provided by senate committee services and the office of program research. The
workgroup shall submit its findings and recommendations to the senate state and
local government committee and the house of representatives state government
committee not later than December 15, 2002. The workgroup shall terminate on
December 31, 2002.

---
END ---