BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF
WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1. RCW 4.24.510 and 1999 c
54 s 1 are each amended to read as follows:

A person
who in good faith communicates a complaint or information to any branch or
agency of federal, state, or local government, or to any self-regulatory
organization that regulates persons involved in the securities or futures
business and that has been delegated authority by a federal, state, or local
government agency and is subject to oversight by the delegating agency, is
immune from civil liability for claims based upon the communication to the
agency or organization regarding any matter reasonably of concern to that
agency or organization. The party who brings a cause of action against a
person for a communication that falls under this section has the burden of
proving that the communication was not made in good faith by showing that the
communication was made with knowledge that it is false or with reckless
disregard for its truth. A person prevailing upon the defense provided for
in this section ((shall be)) is entitled to recover costs,
other reasonable expenses, and reasonable attorneys' fees incurred in
establishing the defense.

--- END ---