BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF
WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec.
1. A new section is added
to chapter 70.96A RCW to read as follows:

A program for the
treatment of pathological gambling is established within the department of
social and health services, to be administered by a qualified person who has
training and experience in handling pathological gambling problems or the
organization or administration of treatment services for persons suffering from
pathological gambling problems.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
2. A new section is added
to chapter 70.96A RCW to read as follows:

(1) To receive
treatment under section 1 of this act, a person must:

(a) Need treatment for
pathological gambling, but be unable to afford treatment; and

(b) Be targeted by the
department as to be most amenable to treatment.

(2) Treatment under
section 1 of this act is limited to the funds available to the department.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
3. (1) The sum of one
million dollars, or as much thereof as may be necessary, is appropriated for
the fiscal year ending June 30, 2003, from the general fund to the division of
alcohol and substance abuse in the department of social and health services for
the treatment of pathological gamblers.

(2) The sum of one
million dollars, or as much thereof as may be necessary, is appropriated for
the fiscal year ending June 30, 2004, from the general fund to the division of
alcohol and substance abuse in the department of social and health services for
the treatment of pathological gamblers.

(3) The sum of five
hundred thousand dollars, or as much thereof as may be necessary, is
appropriated for the fiscal year ending June 30, 2003, from the general fund to
the Washington state gambling commission for use in problem gambling
prevention, youth education, public awareness, training, and helpline services.

(4) The
sum of five hundred thousand dollars, or as much thereof as may be necessary,
is appropriated for the fiscal year ending June 30, 2004, from the general fund
to the Washington state gambling commission for use in problem gambling
prevention, youth education, public awareness, training, and helpline services.

---
END ---