BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF
WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1. RCW 6.17.020 and 1997 c
121 s 1 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) Except as provided
in subsections (2), (3), and (4) of this section, the party in whose favor a
judgment of a court ((of record of this state or a district court of this
state)) has been or may be filed or rendered, or the assignee or
the current holder thereof, may have an execution, garnishment, or other
legal process issued for the collection or enforcement of the judgment at
any time within ten years from entry of the judgment or the filing of the
judgment in this state.

(2) After July 23,
1989, a party who obtains a judgment or order of a court ((of record of any
state,)) or an administrative order entered as defined in RCW 74.20A.020(6)
for accrued child support, or the assignee or the current holder thereof,
may have an execution, garnishment, or other legal process issued upon
that judgment or order at any time within ten years of the eighteenth birthday
of the youngest child named in the order for whom support is ordered.

(3) After June 9, 1994,
a party in whose favor a judgment has been filed as a foreign judgment or
rendered pursuant to subsection (1) or (4) of this section, or the assignee
or the current holder thereof, may, within ninety days before the
expiration of the original ten-year period, apply to the court that rendered
the judgment or to the court where the judgment was filed as a foreign
judgment for an order granting an additional ten years during which an
execution, garnishment, or other legal process may be issued. If a
district court judgment of this state is transcribed to a superior court of
this state, the original district court judgment shall not be extended and any
petition under this section to extend the judgment that has been transcribed to
superior court shall be filed in the superior court within ninety days before
the expiration of the ten-year period of the date the transcript of the
district court judgment was filed in the superior court of this state. The
petitioner shall pay to the court a filing fee equal to the filing fee for
filing the first or initial paper in a civil action in the court, except in
the case of district court judgments transcribed to superior court, where the
filing fee shall be the fee for filing the first or initial paper in a civil
action in the superior court where the judgment was transcribed. ((When
application is made to the court to grant an additional ten years, the
application shall be accompanied by a current and)) The order granting
the application shall contain an updated judgment summary as ((outlined))
provided in RCW 4.64.030. The filing fee required under this subsection
shall be included in the judgment summary and shall be a recoverable cost. The
application shall be granted as a matter of right, subject to review only for
timeliness, factual issues of full or partial satisfaction, or errors in
calculating the judgment summary amounts.

(4) A party who obtains
a judgment or order for restitution, crime victims' assessment, or other
court-ordered legal financial obligations pursuant to a criminal judgment and
sentence, or the assignee or the current holder thereof, may execute,
garnish, and/or have legal process issued upon the judgment or order any
time within ten years subsequent to the entry of the judgment and sentence or
ten years following the offender's release from total confinement as provided
in chapter 9.94A RCW. The clerk of superior court, or a party designated by
the clerk, may seek extension under subsection (3) of this section for
purposes of collection as allowed under RCW 36.18.190, provided that no
filing fee shall be required.

(5)
"Court" as used in this section includes but is not limited to the
United States supreme court, the United States courts of appeals, the United
States district courts, the United States bankruptcy courts, the Washington
state supreme court, the court of appeals of the state of Washington, superior
courts and district courts of the counties of the state of Washington, and
courts of other states and jurisdictions from which judgment has been filed in
this state under chapter 6.36 or 6.40 RCW.

(6) The perfection
of any judgment lien and the priority of that judgment lien on property as
established by RCW 6.13.090 and chapter 4.56 RCW is not altered by the extension
of the judgment pursuant to the provisions of this section and the lien remains
in full force and effect and does not have to be rerecorded after it is
extended. Continued perfection of a judgment that has been transcribed to
other counties and perfected in those counties may be accomplished after
extension of the judgment by filing with clerk of the other counties where the
judgment has been filed either a certified copy of the order extending the
judgment or a certified copy of the docket of the matter where the judgment was
extended.

(7) Except as
provided for in RCW 4.16.020 (2) or (3) or chapter 9.94A or 13.40 RCW, no
judgment is enforceable for a period exceeding twenty years from the date of
entry of the judgment by the originating court. Nothing in this section should
be interpreted to extend the expiration date of a foreign judgment beyond the
expiration date applicable under the laws of the jurisdiction in which the
judgment originated.

(8) The chapter
. . ., Laws of 2002 amendments to this section apply to all judgments
currently in effect on the effective date of this section, to all judgments
extended after June 9, 1994, unless the judgment has been satisfied, vacated,
or quashed, and to all judgments either filed or rendered, or both, after the
effective date of this section.

Sec. 2. RCW 4.16.020 and 1994 c
189 s 2 are each amended to read as follows:

The period prescribed
for the commencement of actions shall be as follows:

Within ten years:

(1) For actions for the
recovery of real property, or for the recovery of the possession thereof; and
no action shall be maintained for such recovery unless it appears that the
plaintiff, his or her ancestor, predecessor or grantor was seized or possessed
of the premises in question within ten years before the commencement of the
action.

(2) For an action upon
a judgment or decree of any court of the United States, or of any state or
territory within the United States, or of any territory or possession of the
United States outside the boundaries thereof, or of any extraterritorial court
of the United States, unless the ((ten-year)) period is extended ((in
accordance with)) under RCW 6.17.020(((3))) or a similar
provision in another jurisdiction.

(3) Of the eighteenth
birthday of the youngest child named in the order for whom support is ordered
for an action to collect past due child support that has accrued under an order
entered after July 23, 1989, by any of the above-named courts or that has
accrued under an administrative order as defined in RCW 74.20A.020(6), which is
issued after July 23, 1989.

Sec. 3. RCW 4.56.200 and 1987 c
202 s 117 are each amended to read as follows:

The lien of judgments
upon the real estate of the judgment debtor shall commence as follows:

(1) Judgments of the
district court of the United States rendered or filed in the county in
which the real estate of the judgment debtor is situated, and judgments of the
superior court for the county in which the real estate of the judgment debtor
is situated, from the time of the entry or filing thereof;

(2) Judgments of the district
court of the United States rendered in any county in this state other than that
in which the real estate of the judgment debtor to be affected is situated,
judgments of the supreme court of this state, judgments of the court of appeals
of this state, and judgments of the superior court for any county other than
that in which the real estate of the judgment debtor to be affected is
situated, from the time of the filing of a duly certified abstract of such
judgment with the county clerk of the county in which the real estate of the
judgment debtor to be affected is situated, as provided in this act;

(3) Judgments of a
district court of this state rendered or filed as a foreign judgment in a
superior court in the county in which the real estate of the judgment
debtor is situated, from the time of the filing of a duly certified transcript
of the docket of the district court with the county clerk of the county in
which such judgment was rendered or filed, and upon such filing said
judgment shall become to all intents and purposes a judgment of the superior
court for said county; and

(4) Judgments of a
district court of this state rendered or filed in a superior court in
any other county in this state than that in which the real estate of the
judgment debtor to be affected is situated, a transcript of the docket of which
has been filed with the county clerk of the county where such judgment was
rendered or filed, from the time of filing, with the county clerk of the
county in which the real estate of the judgment debtor to be affected is
situated, of a duly certified abstract of the record of said judgment in the
office of the county clerk of the county in which the certified transcript of
the docket of said judgment of said district court was originally filed.

Sec. 4. RCW 6.36.025 and 1994 c
185 s 6 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) A copy of any
foreign judgment authenticated in accordance with the act of congress or the
statutes of this state may be filed in the office of the clerk of any superior
court of any county of this state. The clerk shall treat the foreign judgment
in the same manner as a judgment of the superior court of this state. A
judgment so filed has the same effect and is subject to the same procedures,
defenses, set-offs, counterclaims, cross-complaints, and proceedings for
reopening, vacating, ((or)) staying, or extending as a judgment
of a superior court of this state and may be enforced, extended, or
satisfied in like manner.

(2) Alternatively, a
copy of any foreign judgment (a) authenticated in accordance with the act of
congress or the statutes of this state, and (b) within the civil jurisdiction
and venue of the district court as provided in RCW 3.66.020, 3.66.030, and
3.66.040, may be filed in the office of the clerk of any district court of this
state. The clerk shall treat the foreign judgment in the same manner as a
judgment of the district court of this state. A judgment so filed has the same
effect and is subject to the same procedures, defenses, set-offs,
counterclaims, cross-complaints, and proceedings for reopening, vacating, ((or))
staying, transcribing, or extending as a judgment of a district court of
this state, and may be enforced, transcribed, extended, or satisfied in
like manner.

(3) The
lien of any judgment filed under subsection (1) or (2) of this section shall be
governed by chapter 4.56 RCW and RCW 6.17.020.

---
END ---