BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF
WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec.
1. The legislature finds
that dental caries, one of the most prevalent diseases known, is often
irreversible and has a significant medical and economic impact on millions of
sufferers. The legislature further finds that fluoride is known to reduce
tooth decay and its associated pain and suffering by as much as forty percent,
yet despite its proven benefits, many Washingtonians are not served by
fluoridated water supplies, the most cost-effective means of providing this
trace element to the population. The legislature further finds that the state
of Washington has a compelling need for current, reliable, and comprehensive
information regarding the potential benefits of fluoridation in reducing expenditures
incurred by medicaid and other public health programs.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 2. The department of health
must study the costs and benefits of dental disease prevention through
fluoridation of public water supplies. At a minimum, the study must include a
review of medicaid and other public health costs to the state to determine the
extent to which differences in these costs in different regions of the state
are attributable to the presence or absence of fluoridated public water
supplies. The costs of the study shall be borne by foundation grants. The
department of health must submit a report of its findings to the legislature by
December 31, 2002.

---
END ---