BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF
WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec.
1. The legislature
recognizes that the constitution provides an accused in criminal prosecutions
the right to a speedy public trial by an impartial jury. The legislature also
recognizes that the constitution ensures victims and their families a meaningful
role in the criminal justice system and accords them the dignity and respect
they are due by granting them certain basic and fundamental rights, including
the general right to be informed of and to attend the defendant's trial and all
other court proceedings the defendant has the right to attend and to make a
statement at the defendant's sentencing and at any proceeding where the
defendant's release is considered. To ensure the full administration of
justice, the safety of the public, the rights of victims and their families,
and the rights of the accused, the legislature intends by this act that a
criminal charge may not be dismissed based on the time it takes to come to
trial unless the rights of the accused have been prejudiced to such an extent
that it has materially affected the accused's right to a fair trial.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
2. (1) An accused charged
with a crime in a court of limited jurisdiction or superior court who pleads
not guilty and does not waive his or her right to a speedy trial and:

(a) Who is not released
from jail pending trial shall be brought to trial not later than sixty days
after the date of arraignment; or

(b) Who is released
from jail at any time prior to trial, whether or not subjected to conditions of
release pending trial and whether or not the release is revoked by court order
prior to trial, shall be brought to trial not later than ninety days after the
date of arraignment.

(2) An accused charged
with an offense in juvenile court who pleads not guilty and does not waive his
or her right to a speedy adjudication and:

(a) Who is not released
from detention pending adjudication shall be brought to trial not later than
thirty days after the date of arraignment; or

(b) Who is released
from detention at any time prior to adjudication, whether or not subjected to
conditions of release pending trial and whether or not the release is revoked
by court order prior to adjudication, shall be brought to trial not later than
sixty days after the date of arraignment.

(3) For purposes of
this section, "arraignment" means the actual date on which a plea is
entered to the charge.

(4)(a) The court shall,
no later than fifteen days after the accused's arraignment, set a date for
trial or adjudication which is within the time limits prescribed by this
section and notify counsel for each party of the date set. If a party is not
represented by counsel, the notice shall be given to the party, and may be
mailed to the party's last known address. The notice shall set forth the
proper date of the accused's arraignment as established at the time of
arraignment and the date set for trial or adjudication.

(b) A party who objects
to the date set by the court for trial or adjudication, or any extension
thereof, upon the ground that it is not within the time limits prescribed by
this section must, within ten days after the notice is mailed or otherwise
given, move that the court set a date for trial or adjudication within those
time limits. Such motion shall be promptly noted for hearing by the moving
party in accordance with local procedures. Failure of a party for any reason
to make such a motion shall be a waiver of the objection that a trial or
adjudication commenced on such date, or on an extension of such date properly
granted pursuant to this section, is not within the time limits prescribed by
this section.

(c) A criminal charge
not brought to trial or adjudication within the time period as provided for
under this section shall result in dismissal with prejudice or discipline of
the attorneys or court administrators causing the delay. However, a criminal
charge may not be dismissed with prejudice for a violation of this section
unless the accused files a timely objection to the date set by the court for
trial or adjudication, the accused demonstrates that his or her ability to put
forth a defense has been substantially prejudiced by the violation, and the
state, through no fault of the accused, fails to bring the matter to trial or
adjudication within the next ten judicial days after the hearing on the
accused's objection or within the time limits prescribed by this section,
whichever is later. The court shall consider the effect of the dismissal on
crime victims and their families and on the safety of the community. The court
must find that arbitrary action or governmental misconduct has prejudiced the
rights of the accused to such an extent that it has materially affected the
accused's right to a fair trial or adjudication and that the dismissal is
necessary for the furtherance of justice. The court shall fully set forth its
reasons in a written order. It shall be sufficient grounds for continuing a
trial or adjudication date if the court finds, balancing the interests
involved, that a short continuance as determined by the court is necessary for
the due administration of justice and a reasonable continuance will not
materially affect the accused's rights to a fair trial.

(5) The following
periods shall be excluded in computing the time for trial or adjudication
specified in this section:

(a) The time between
the filing of the charge and arraignment;

(b) All proceedings
relating to the competency or capacity of the accused to stand trial or
adjudication, terminating when the court enters an order finding the accused to
be competent or capable;

(c) Preliminary
proceedings, trial, adjudication, posttrial motions, and sentencing or
disposition on another charge;

(d) Continuances
granted by the court, on its own motion or on the motion of either party under
the following circumstances:

(i) If the accused
consents to the continuance and good cause is shown; or

(ii) If evidence is
presently unavailable, and the party making the motion has exercised due
diligence, and there are reasonable grounds to believe the evidence will become
available within a reasonable time; or

(iii) If required in
the due administration of justice and the accused will not be substantially
prejudiced in the presentation of his or her defense;

(e) The time between
the dismissal of a charge and the accused's arraignment or rearraignment in
court following the refiling of the same charge or charges based upon the same
conduct;

(f) The time during
which an accused is detained in jail, prison, or other detention facility
outside the county in which the accused is charged or in a federal jail,
prison, or other detention facility and the time during which an accused is
subjected to conditions of release not imposed by a court of the state of
Washington;

(g) The time between a
motion for revision of a court commissioner's ruling and the entry of a
decision by a judge;

(h) All proceedings
relating to whether a juvenile court will retain jurisdiction over the charges,
ending with the entry of an order retaining juvenile court jurisdiction or
arraignment in superior court following entry of an order declining juvenile
court jurisdiction.

(6) The times for trial
or adjudication specified in subsections (1) and (2) of this section shall
begin anew following:

(a) The court's
declaration of a mistrial;

(b) The entry of an
order granting a new trial or adjudication;

(c) An accused's first
appearance in court following a remand for trial or adjudication after an appellate
court accepts review or stays proceedings;

(d) An accused's first
appearance in court following the entry of an order for new trial or
adjudication by a federal court;

(e) The entry of an
order allowing the accused to withdraw a guilty plea;

(f) An accused's
withdrawal of a petition for deferred prosecution; or

(g) An accused's first
appearance in court on the record following his or her failure to appear for
any trial or adjudication or pretrial or preliminary proceeding at which his or
her presence is required.

(7) If a change of
venue is granted to an accused or if the prosecuting attorney or judge becomes
disqualified from participating in the case, the accused shall be brought to
trial or adjudication as prescribed by this section or not later than sixty
days following the entry of the order changing venue or the disqualification,
whichever is later.

(8) An accused may
waive his or her time for trial or adjudication rights. A waiver shall be in
writing and shall be signed by the accused. The waiver shall be to a date
certain beyond the current expiration date as calculated under this section or
for a period of days beyond the current expiration date.

(9) To the extent that
court rules CrR 3.3, CrRLJ 3.3, and JuCR 7.8 on the right to a speedy trial are
inconsistent with this section, those rules are superseded by this section.

(10) This section
applies in all cases where the accused is arraigned on or after the effective
date of this act.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 3. Sections 1 and 2 of this
act constitute a new chapter in Title 10 RCW.

---
END ---