BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF
WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1. RCW 74.39A.030 and 2002
c 3 s 10 (Initiative Measure No. 775) are each amended to read as follows:

(1) To the extent of
available funding, the department shall expand cost-effective options for home
and community services for consumers for whom the state participates in the
cost of their care.

(2) In expanding home
and community services, the department shall: (a) Take full advantage of
federal funding available under Title XVIII and Title XIX of the federal social
security act, including home health, adult day care, waiver options, and state
plan services; and (b) be authorized to use funds available under its community
options program entry system waiver granted under section 1915(c) of the
federal social security act to expand the availability of in-home, adult
residential care, adult family homes, enhanced adult residential care, and
assisted living services. By June 30, 1997, the department shall undertake to
reduce the nursing home medicaid census by at least one thousand six hundred by
assisting individuals who would otherwise require nursing facility services to
obtain services of their choice, including assisted living services, enhanced
adult residential care, and other home and community services. If a resident,
or his or her legal representative, objects to a discharge decision initiated
by the department, the resident shall not be discharged if the resident has
been assessed and determined to require nursing facility services. In
contracting with nursing homes and boarding homes for enhanced adult
residential care placements, the department shall not require, by contract or
through other means, structural modifications to existing building
construction.

(3)(a) The department
shall by rule establish payment rates for home and community services that
support the provision of cost-effective care. In the event of any conflict
between any such rule and a collective bargaining agreement entered into under
sections 6 and 9, chapter 3 (Initiative Measure No. 775), Laws of 2002, the
collective bargaining agreement prevails.

(b) The department may
authorize an enhanced adult residential care rate for nursing homes that
temporarily or permanently convert their bed use for the purpose of providing
enhanced adult residential care under chapter 70.38 RCW, when the department
determines that payment of an enhanced rate is cost-effective and necessary to
foster expansion of contracted enhanced adult residential care services. As an
incentive for nursing homes to permanently convert a portion of its nursing
home bed capacity for the purpose of providing enhanced adult residential care,
the department may authorize a supplemental add-on to the enhanced adult
residential care rate.

(c) The department may
authorize a supplemental assisted living services rate for up to four years for
facilities that convert from nursing home use and do not retain rights to the
converted nursing home beds under chapter 70.38 RCW, if the department
determines that payment of a supplemental rate is cost-effective and necessary
to foster expansion of contracted assisted living services.

(d) The
department may not implement any payment rate methodology that will increase
administrative costs for the department or providers beyond the administrative
costs associated with the rate methodology in effect as of January 1, 2002.
The department may not implement any new licensing rules or resident service
standards that will increase the costs to providers, except to the extent that
the costs associated with any such rules or service standards are fully
incorporated through adjustments to the existing payment rates.

--- END ---