BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF
WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1. RCW 18.20.270 and 2000 c
121 s 2 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) The definitions in
this subsection apply throughout this section unless the context clearly
requires otherwise.

(a)
"Caregiver" includes any person who provides residents with hands-on
personal care on behalf of a boarding home, except volunteers who are directly
supervised.

(b) "Direct
supervision" means oversight by a person who has demonstrated competency
in the core areas or has been fully exempted from the training requirements
pursuant to this section, is on the premises, and is quickly and easily
available to the caregiver.

(2) Training must have
the following components: Orientation, basic training, specialty training as
appropriate, and continuing education. All boarding home employees or
volunteers who routinely interact with residents shall complete orientation.
Boarding home administrators, or their designees, and caregivers shall complete
orientation, basic training, specialty training as appropriate, and continuing
education.

(3) Orientation
consists of introductory information on residents' rights, communication skills,
fire and life safety, and universal precautions. Orientation must be provided
at the facility by appropriate boarding home staff to all boarding home
employees before the employees have routine interaction with residents.

(4) Basic training
consists of modules on the core knowledge and skills that caregivers need to
learn and understand to effectively and safely provide care to residents.
Basic training must be outcome-based, and the effectiveness of the basic
training must be measured by demonstrated competency in the core areas through
the use of a competency test. Basic training must be completed by caregivers
within one hundred twenty days of the date on which they begin to provide
hands-on care or within one hundred twenty days of ((March)) September
1, 2002, whichever is later. Until competency in the core areas has been
demonstrated, caregivers shall not provide hands-on personal care to residents
without direct supervision. Boarding home administrators, or their designees,
must complete basic training and demonstrate competency within one hundred
twenty days of employment or within one hundred twenty days of ((March))
September 1, 2002, whichever is later.

(5) For boarding homes
that serve residents with special needs such as dementia, developmental
disabilities, or mental illness, specialty training is required of
administrators, or designees, and caregivers. Specialty training consists of
modules on the core knowledge and skills that caregivers need to effectively
and safely provide care to residents with special needs. Specialty training
should be integrated into basic training wherever appropriate. Specialty
training must be outcome-based, and the effectiveness of the specialty training
measured by demonstrated competency in the core specialty areas through the use
of a competency test. Specialty training must be completed by caregivers
within one hundred twenty days of the date on which they begin to provide
hands-on care to a resident having special needs or within one hundred twenty
days of ((March)) September 1, 2002, whichever is later.
However, if specialty training is not integrated with basic training, the
specialty training must be completed within ninety days of completion of basic
training. Until competency in the core specialty areas has been demonstrated,
caregivers shall not provide hands-on personal care to residents with special
needs without direct supervision. Boarding home administrators, or their
designees, must complete specialty training and demonstrate competency within
one hundred twenty days of ((March)) September 1, 2002, or one
hundred twenty days from the date on which the administrator or his or her
designee is hired, whichever is later, if the boarding home serves one or
more residents with special needs.

(6) Continuing
education consists of ongoing delivery of information to caregivers on various
topics relevant to the care setting and care needs of residents. Competency
testing is not required for continuing education. Continuing education is not
required during the first year following completion of the basic training. If
specialty training is completed, the specialty training applies toward any
continuing education requirement for up to two years following the completion
of the specialty training.

(7) Persons who
successfully challenge the competency test for basic training are fully exempt
from the basic training requirements of this section. Persons who successfully
challenge the specialty training competency test are fully exempt from the specialty
training requirements of this section.

(8) Licensed persons
who perform the tasks for which they are licensed are fully or partially exempt
from the training requirements of this section, as specified by the department
in rule.

(9) In an effort to improve
access to training and education and reduce costs, especially for rural
communities, the coordinated system of long-term care training and education
must include the use of innovative types of learning strategies such as
internet resources, videotapes, and distance learning using satellite
technology coordinated through community colleges or other entities, as defined
by the department.

(10) The community
long-term care training and education steering committee established under RCW
74.39A.190 shall develop criteria for the approval of orientation, basic
training, and specialty training programs.

(11) Boarding homes
that desire to deliver facility-based training with facility designated
trainers, or boarding homes that desire to pool their resources to create
shared training systems, must be encouraged by the department in their
efforts. The community long-term care training and education steering
committee shall develop criteria for reviewing and approving trainers and
training materials that are substantially similar to or better than the
materials developed by the steering committee. The department may approve a
curriculum based upon attestation by a boarding home administrator that the
boarding home's training curriculum addresses basic and specialty training
competencies identified by the department, and shall review a curriculum to
verify that it meets these requirements. The department may conduct the review
as part of the regularly scheduled yearly inspection and investigation required
under RCW 18.20.110. The department may rescind approval of any curriculum if
it determines that the curriculum does not meet these requirements.

(12) The department
shall adopt rules by ((March)) September 1, 2002, for the
implementation of this section based on the recommendations of the community
long-term care training and education steering committee established in RCW
74.39A.190.

(13) The orientation,
basic training, specialty training, and continuing education requirements of
this section ((take effect March)) commence September 1, 2002, or
one hundred twenty days from the date of employment, whichever is later,
and shall be applied ((prospectively)) to (a) employees hired
subsequent to September 1, 2002; and (b) existing employees that on September
1, 2002, have not successfully completed the training requirements under RCW
74.39A.010, and this section. Existing employees who have not successfully
completed the training requirements under RCW 74.39A.010, 74.39A.020, and this
section shall be subject to all applicable requirements of this section.
However, nothing in this section affects the current training requirements
under RCW 74.39A.010.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
2. A new section is added
to chapter 43.20A RCW to read as follows:

The department shall
publish its final basic and specialty training competencies and learning
outcomes as required by chapter 121, Laws of 2000 no later than June 1, 2002.

Sec. 3. RCW 70.128.230 and 2000
c 121 s 3 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) The definitions in
this subsection apply throughout this section unless the context clearly
requires otherwise.

(a)
"Caregiver" includes all adult family home resident managers and any
person who provides residents with hands-on personal care on behalf of an adult
family home, except volunteers who are directly supervised.

(b) "Indirect
supervision" means oversight by a person who has demonstrated competency
in the core areas or has been fully exempted from the training requirements
pursuant to this section and is quickly and easily available to the caregiver,
but not necessarily on-site.

(2) Training must have
three components: Orientation, basic training, and continuing education. All
adult family home providers, resident managers, and employees, or volunteers
who routinely interact with residents shall complete orientation. Caregivers
shall complete orientation, basic training, and continuing education.

(3) Orientation
consists of introductory information on residents' rights, communication
skills, fire and life safety, and universal precautions. Orientation must be
provided at the facility by appropriate adult family home staff to all adult
family home employees before the employees have routine interaction with residents.

(4) Basic training
consists of modules on the core knowledge and skills that caregivers need to
learn and understand to effectively and safely provide care to residents.
Basic training must be outcome-based, and the effectiveness of the basic training
must be measured by demonstrated competency in the core areas through the use
of a competency test. Basic training must be completed by caregivers within
one hundred twenty days of the date on which they begin to provide hands-on
care or within one hundred twenty days of ((March)) September 1,
2002, whichever is later. Until competency in the core areas has been
demonstrated, caregivers shall not provide hands-on personal care to residents
without indirect supervision.

(5) For adult family
homes that serve residents with special needs such as dementia, developmental
disabilities, or mental illness, specialty training is required of providers
and resident managers. Specialty training consists of modules on the core
knowledge and skills that providers and resident managers need to effectively
and safely provide care to residents with special needs. Specialty training
should be integrated into basic training wherever appropriate. Specialty
training must be outcome-based, and the effectiveness of the specialty training
measured by demonstrated competency in the core specialty areas through the use
of a competency test. Specialty training must be completed by providers and
resident managers before admitting and serving residents who have been determined
to have special needs related to mental illness, dementia, or a developmental
disability. Should a resident develop special needs while living in a home
without specialty designation, the provider and resident manager have one
hundred twenty days to complete specialty training.

(6) Continuing
education consists of ongoing delivery of information to caregivers on various
topics relevant to the care setting and care needs of residents. Competency
testing is not required for continuing education. Continuing education is not
required during the first year following completion of the basic training. If
specialty training is completed, the specialty training applies toward any
continuing education requirement for up to two years following the completion of
the specialty training.

(7) Persons who
successfully challenge the competency test for basic training are fully exempt
from the basic training requirements of this section. Persons who successfully
challenge the specialty training competency test are fully exempt from the specialty
training requirements of this section.

(8) Licensed persons
who perform the tasks for which they are licensed are fully or partially exempt
from the training requirements of this section, as specified by the department
in rule.

(9) In an effort to improve
access to training and education and reduce costs, especially for rural
communities, the coordinated system of long-term care training and education
must include the use of innovative types of learning strategies such as
internet resources, videotapes, and distance learning using satellite
technology coordinated through community colleges, private associations, or
other entities, as defined by the department.

(10) Adult family homes
that desire to deliver facility-based training with facility designated
trainers, or adult family homes that desire to pool their resources to create
shared training systems, must be encouraged by the department in their
efforts. The community long-term care training and education steering
committee shall develop criteria for reviewing and approving trainers and
training materials. The department may approve a curriculum based upon
attestation by an adult family home administrator that the adult family home's
training curriculum addresses basic and specialty training competencies
identified by the department, and shall review a curriculum to verify that it
meets these requirements. The department may conduct the review as part of the
inspection authorized under RCW 70.128.070. The department may rescind
approval of any curriculum if it determines that the curriculum does not meet
these requirements.

(11) The department
shall adopt rules by ((March)) September 1, 2002, for the
implementation of this section based on the recommendations of the community
long-term care training and education steering committee established in RCW
74.39A.190.

(12) The orientation,
basic training, specialty training, and continuing education requirements of
this section ((take effect March)) commence September 1, 2002,
and shall be applied ((prospectively)) to (a) employees hired
subsequent to September 1, 2002; or (b) existing employees that on September 1,
2002, have not successfully completed the training requirements under RCW
70.128.120, 70.128.130, and this section. Existing employees who have not
successfully completed the training requirements under RCW 70.128.120 and this
section shall be subject to all applicable requirements of this section.
However, nothing in this section affects the current training requirements
under RCW 70.128.120 and 70.128.130.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 4. This act is necessary for
the immediate preservation of the public peace, health, or safety, or support
of the state government and its existing public institutions, and takes effect immediately.

---
END ---