BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF
WASHINGTON:

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 1. It is the intent of the
legislature that the department of social and health services must adopt due
process rules to clarify for boarding home providers definitions and thresholds
for noncompliance or violations of chapter 18.20 RCW that trigger sanctions
available to the department under RCW 18.20.190. It is the intent of the
legislature that sanctions under RCW 18.20.190 not be imposed for violations of
chapter 18.20 RCW that: (1) Do not cause more than minimal actual harm to a
resident; (2) do not appear to be systemic in nature with the potential, if
uncorrected, to cause significant physical harm to residents; (3) do not cause
or create imminent danger of significant physical harm to one or more
residents, unless such a violation is recurring; and (4) are corrected prior to
the last day of the department's on-site visit in which such a violation is
discovered. In adopting due process rules, the department of social and health
services must work with boarding home providers, organizations representing
boarding homes, residents, and those representing residents of boarding homes.
The department must adopt rules governing the rights of boarding home providers
to appeal, under chapter 34.05 RCW, findings of noncompliance or violations of
chapter 18.20 RCW. The department of social and health services must adopt its
final rules by September 1, 2002.

---
END ---