BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF
WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec.
1. It is the intent of the
legislature to protect the integrity of the election process for minor
political parties and independent candidates. This act is not intended to
create barriers to the political process for minor political parties and
independent candidates, but to prevent major political parties from interfering
in the nominating process for minor political parties and independent
candidates.

Sec. 2. RCW 29.24.020 and 2001 c
30 s 2 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) Any nomination of a
candidate for partisan public office by other than a major political party may
be made only: (a) In a convention held not earlier than the last Saturday in
June and not later than the first Saturday in July or during any of the seven
days immediately preceding the first day for filing declarations of candidacy
as fixed in accordance with RCW 29.68.080; (b) as provided by RCW 29.62.180; or
(c) as otherwise provided in this section.

(2) Nominations of
candidates for president and vice president of the United States other than by
a major political party may be made either at a convention conducted under
subsection (1) of this section, or at a similar convention taking place not
earlier than the first Sunday in July and not later than seventy days before
the general election. Conventions held during this time period may not
nominate candidates for any public office other than president and vice
president of the United States, except as provided in subsection (3) of this
section.

(3) If a special filing
period for a partisan office is opened under RCW 29.15.230, candidates of minor
political parties and independent candidates may file for office during that
special filing period. The names of those candidates may not appear on the ballot
unless they are nominated by convention held no later than five days after the
close of the special filing period and a certificate of nomination is filed
with the filing officer no later than three days after the convention. The
requirements of RCW 29.24.025 do not apply to such a convention. If primary
ballots or a voters' pamphlet are ordered to be printed before the deadline for
submitting the certificate of nomination and the certificate has not been
filed, then the candidate's name will be included but may not appear on the
general election ballot unless the certificate is timely filed and the
candidate otherwise qualifies to appear on that ballot.

(4) A
minor political party may hold more than one convention but in no case shall
any such party nominate more than one candidate for any one partisan public
office or position. For the purpose of nominating candidates for the offices
of president and vice president, United States senator, or a statewide office,
a minor party or independent candidate holding multiple conventions may add
together the number of signatures of different individuals from each convention
obtained in support of the candidate or candidates in order to obtain the
number required by RCW 29.24.030. For all other offices for which nominations
are made, signatures of the requisite number of registered voters must be
obtained at a single convention, and the candidate or candidates nominated
must be present at the convention or must provide a notarized statement
executed prior to the convention expressing a willingness to be nominated.

Sec. 3. RCW 29.24.025 and 1989 c
215 s 1 are each amended to read as follows:

Each minor party or
independent candidate must publish a notice in a newspaper of general
circulation within the county in which the party or the candidate intends to
hold a convention and must file a notice with the appropriate filing officer
as provided in RCW 29.24.040(7). The notice must appear at least ten days
before the convention is to be held, ((and)) shall state the date, time,
and place of the convention((. Additionally, it)), and shall
include the mailing address of the person or organization sponsoring the
convention.

Sec. 4. RCW 29.24.030 and 1989 c
215 s 3 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) To be valid, a
convention must be attended by at least twenty-five registered voters.

(2) In order to
nominate candidates for the offices of president and vice-president of the
United States, United States senator, or any state-wide office, a nominating
convention shall obtain and submit to the filing officer the signatures of at
least two hundred registered voters of the state of Washington. In order to
nominate candidates for any other office, a nominating convention shall obtain
and submit to the filing officer the signatures of twenty-five persons who are
registered to vote in the jurisdiction of the office for which the nominations
are made. No person who is a precinct committee officer may sign a
nominating petition submitted under this chapter.

Sec. 5. RCW 29.24.035 and 2001 c
64 s 1 are each amended to read as follows:

A nominating petition
submitted under this chapter shall clearly identify the name of the minor party
or independent candidate convention as it appears on the certificate of
nomination as required by RCW 29.24.040(3), and the name of the candidate or
candidates to be nominated. The petition shall also contain a statement
that the person signing the petition is a registered voter of the state of
Washington and shall have a space for the voter to sign his or her name and to
print his or her name and address. No person may sign more than one nominating
petition under this chapter for an office for a primary or election. No
person who is a precinct committee officer may sign a nominating petition
submitted under this chapter.

Sec. 6. RCW 29.24.040 and 1989 c
215 s 4 are each amended to read as follows:

A certificate
evidencing nominations made at a convention must:

(1) Be in writing;

(2) Contain the name of
each person nominated, his residence, and the office for which he is named, and
if the nomination is for the offices of president and vice-president of the
United States, a sworn statement from both nominees giving their consent to the
nomination;

(3) Identify the minor
political party or the independent candidate on whose behalf the convention was
held;

(4) Be verified by the
oath of the presiding officer and secretary, neither of whom may be a
precinct officer;

(5) Be accompanied by a
nominating petition or petitions bearing the signatures and addresses of
registered voters equal in number to that required by RCW 29.24.030;

(6) Contain proof of
publication of the notice of calling the convention; and

(7) Be submitted to the
appropriate filing officer not later than one week following the adjournment of
the convention at which the nominations were made. If the nominations are made
only for offices whose jurisdiction is entirely within one county, the
certificate and nominating petitions must be filed with the county auditor. If
a minor party or independent candidate convention nominates any candidates for
offices whose jurisdiction encompasses more than one county, all nominating
petitions and the convention certificates must be filed with the secretary of
state.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
7. A new section is added
to chapter 29.24 RCW to read as follows:

Every
person who signs a nominating petition using other than his or her true name,
who makes a false statement on a nominating petition as to his or her
residence, who is not registered to vote in the jurisdiction of the office for
which the nomination is made, who signs a nominating petition for a minor
political party or an independent candidate while serving as a precinct
committee officer, who knowingly signs more than one nominating petition for
the same office, who signs a nominating petition that does not clearly identify
the name of the candidate or candidates to be nominated, who serves as a
presiding officer or a secretary at a minor political party or independent
candidate nominating convention while serving as a precinct committee officer,
or who falsely verifies a certificate of nomination, is guilty of a gross
misdemeanor punishable in the same manner as a gross misdemeanor is punishable
under RCW 9A.20.021.

---
END ---