BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF
WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec.
1. The definitions in this
section apply throughout this chapter unless the context clearly requires
otherwise.

(1) "Dealer"
means any person that advertises, represents, or holds itself out as selling,
preparing, or maintaining food as halal including, but not limited to,
manufacturers, slaughterhouses, wholesalers, stores, restaurants, hotels,
catering facilities, butcher shops, summer camps, bakeries, delicatessens,
supermarkets, grocery stores, nursing homes, freezer dealers, and food plan
companies.

(2) "Food
product" includes any article other than drugs, whether in raw or prepared
form, liquid or solid, or packaged or unpackaged, and which is used for human
consumption.

(3) "Halal"
means a food product which has been prepared, processed, manufactured,
maintained, and sold in strict compliance with the laws and customs of the
Islamic religion.

(4) "Person"
includes individuals, partnerships, corporations, and associations.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
2. (1) No dealer may
knowingly sell or offer for sale any food product represented as
"halal" or "halal style" when that dealer knows or should
know that the food product is not halal and when the representation is likely
to cause a prospective purchaser to believe that it is halal. This
representation can be made in writing, or by display of a sign, mark, insignia,
or simulation.

(2) A dealer that sells
"halal" or "halal style" food products, where this food
product represents more than fifty percent of the person's inventory, must:

(a) Label all
"nonhalal" food products as "nonhalal" by display of
appropriate signage or labeling so that the consumer can clearly differentiate
between food products that are "halal" and "nonhalal"; and

(b) Maintain and make
available, upon request, a written copy of ingredients and processes, used in
the preparation of halal food products. This provision only applies if the
information is readily available from the producer, wholesaler, or distributor
of the halal food product.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
3. A violation of this
chapter constitutes a violation of the consumer protection act, chapter 19.86
RCW.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
4. A dealer who violates any
provision of this chapter is guilty of a gross misdemeanor.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
5. This chapter may be known
and cited as the halal food consumer protection act.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
6. Sections 1 through 5 of
this act constitute a new chapter in Title 69 RCW.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 7. Sections 3 and 4 of this
act take effect December 1, 2002.

---
END ---