BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF
WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1. RCW 9.94A.545 and 2000 c
28 s 13 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) On all
sentences of confinement for one year or less, the court may impose up to one
year of community custody, subject to conditions and sanctions as authorized in
RCW 9.94A.715 and 9.94A.720. An offender shall be on community custody as of
the date of sentencing. However, during the time for which the offender is in
total or partial confinement pursuant to the sentence or a violation of the
sentence, the period of community custody shall toll.

(2) The department
may eliminate or terminate any term of community custody imposed by the court
under this section, or any term of community supervision imposed by the court
under prior law, for an offender who is classified at the lowest risk level
pursuant to a risk assessment by the department. No liability may attach to
the state, the department, or any department employee based on the
determination to classify an offender at the lowest risk level, or to eliminate
or terminate a term of community custody or community supervision, in the
absence of intentional misconduct. The decision to eliminate or terminate
community custody or community supervision shall not affect the superior
court's jurisdiction over the offender.

Sec. 2. RCW 9.94A.631 and 1984 c
209 s 11 are each amended to read as follows:

If an offender violates
any condition or requirement of a sentence, a community corrections officer may
arrest or cause the arrest of the offender without a warrant, pending a
determination by the court. If there is reasonable cause to believe that an
offender has violated a condition or requirement of the sentence, an offender
may be required to submit to a search and seizure of the offender's person,
residence, automobile, or other personal property. A community corrections officer
may also arrest an offender for any crime committed in his or her presence.
The facts and circumstances of the conduct of the offender shall be reported by
the community corrections officer, with recommendations, to the court.

If a community
corrections officer arrests or causes the arrest of an offender under this
section, the offender shall be confined and detained in the county jail of the
county in which the offender was taken into custody, and the sheriff of that
county shall receive and keep in the county jail, where room is available, all
prisoners delivered to the jail by the community corrections officer, and such
offenders shall not be released from custody on bail or personal recognizance,
except upon approval of the court, pursuant to a written order.

Community
corrections officers have no obligation to arrest and detain an offender, or to
report a violation to the superior court, where the department has eliminated
or terminated supervision pursuant to RCW 9.94A.545, 9.94A.650, 9.94A.690, 9.94A.700,
9.94A.705, and 9.94A.715.

Sec. 3. RCW 9.94A.637 and 2000 c
119 s 3 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) When an offender
has completed the requirements of the sentence while under the custody or
supervision of the department, the secretary of the department or the
secretary's designee shall notify the sentencing court, which shall discharge
the offender and provide the offender with a certificate of discharge. The
department has no obligation to provide notice under this section if the
offender is no longer under the custody or supervision of the department at the
time the offender completes the requirements of the sentence.

(2) An offender who is
not convicted of a violent offense or a sex offense and is sentenced to a term
involving community supervision may be considered for a discharge of sentence
by the sentencing court prior to the completion of community supervision,
provided that the offender has completed at least one-half of the term of
community supervision and has met all other sentence requirements.

(3) Except as provided
in subsection (4) of this section, the discharge shall have the effect of
restoring all civil rights lost by operation of law upon conviction, and the
certificate of discharge shall so state. Nothing in this section prohibits the
use of an offender's prior record for purposes of determining sentences for
later offenses as provided in this chapter. Nothing in this section affects or
prevents use of the offender's prior conviction in a later criminal prosecution
either as an element of an offense or for impeachment purposes. A certificate
of discharge is not based on a finding of rehabilitation.

(4) Unless otherwise
ordered by the sentencing court, a certificate of discharge shall not terminate
the offender's obligation to comply with an order issued under chapter 10.99
RCW that excludes or prohibits the offender from having contact with a
specified person or coming within a set distance of any specified location that
was contained in the judgment and sentence. An offender who violates such an
order after a certificate of discharge has been issued shall be subject to
prosecution according to the chapter under which the order was originally
issued.

(5) Upon release from
custody, the offender may apply to the department for counseling and help in
adjusting to the community. This voluntary help may be provided for up to one
year following the release from custody.

Sec. 4. RCW 9.94A.650 and 2000 c
28 s 18 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) This section
applies to offenders who have never been previously convicted of a felony in
this state, federal court, or another state, and who have never participated in
a program of deferred prosecution for a felony, and who are convicted of a
felony that is not:

(a) Classified as a
violent offense or a sex offense under this chapter;

(b) Manufacture,
delivery, or possession with intent to manufacture or deliver a controlled
substance classified in Schedule I or II that is a narcotic drug or
flunitrazepam classified in Schedule IV;

(c) Manufacture,
delivery, or possession with intent to deliver a methamphetamine, its salts,
isomers, and salts of its isomers as defined in RCW 69.50.206(d)(2); or

(d) The selling for
profit of any controlled substance or counterfeit substance classified in
Schedule I, RCW 69.50.204, except leaves and flowering tops of marihuana.

(2) In sentencing a
first-time offender the court may waive the imposition of a sentence within the
standard sentence range and impose a sentence which may include up to ninety
days of confinement in a facility operated or utilized under contract by the
county and a requirement that the offender refrain from committing new
offenses. The sentence may also include a term of community supervision or
community custody as specified in subsection (3) of this section, which, in
addition to crime-related prohibitions, may include requirements that the
offender perform any one or more of the following:

(a) Devote time to a
specific employment or occupation;

(b) Undergo available
outpatient treatment for up to the period specified in subsection (3) of this
section, or inpatient treatment not to exceed the standard range of confinement
for that offense;

(c) Pursue a
prescribed, secular course of study or vocational training;

(d) Remain within
prescribed geographical boundaries and notify the community corrections officer
prior to any change in the offender's address or employment;

(e) Report as directed
to a community corrections officer; or

(f) Pay all
court-ordered legal financial obligations as provided in RCW 9.94A.030 and/or
perform community service work.

(3) The terms and
statuses applicable to sentences under subsection (2) of this section are:

(a) For sentences
imposed on or after July 25, 1999, for crimes committed before July 1, 2000, up
to one year of community supervision. If treatment is ordered, the period of
community supervision may include up to the period of treatment, but shall not
exceed two years; and

(b) For crimes
committed on or after July 1, 2000, up to one year of community custody unless
treatment is ordered, in which case the period of community custody may include
up to the period of treatment, but shall not exceed two years. Any term of
community custody imposed under this section is subject to conditions and
sanctions as authorized in this section and in RCW 9.94A.715 (2) and (3).

(4) The department
shall discharge from community supervision any offender sentenced under this
section before July 25, 1999, who has served at least one year of community
supervision and has completed any treatment ordered by the court.

(5) The department
may eliminate or terminate any term of community custody or community
supervision imposed by the court under this section for an offender who is
classified at the lowest risk level pursuant to a risk assessment by the
department. No liability may attach to the state, the department, or any
department employee based on the determination to classify an offender at the
lowest risk level, or to eliminate or terminate a term of community custody or
community supervision, in the absence of intentional misconduct. The decision
to eliminate or terminate community custody or community supervision shall not
affect the superior court's jurisdiction over the offender.

Sec. 5. RCW 9.94A.690 and 2000 c
28 s 21 are each amended to read as follows:

(1)(a) An offender is
eligible to be sentenced to a work ethic camp if the offender:

(i) Is sentenced to a
term of total confinement of not less than twelve months and one day or more
than thirty-six months;

(ii) Has no current or
prior convictions for any sex offenses or for violent offenses; and

(iii) Is not currently
subject to a sentence for, or being prosecuted for, a violation of the uniform
controlled substances act or a criminal solicitation to commit such a violation
under chapter 9A.28 or 69.50 RCW.

(b) The length of the
work ethic camp shall be at least one hundred twenty days and not more than one
hundred eighty days.

(2) If the sentencing
court determines that the offender is eligible for the work ethic camp and is
likely to qualify under subsection (3) of this section, the judge shall impose
a sentence within the standard sentence range and may recommend that the
offender serve the sentence at a work ethic camp. In sentencing an offender to
the work ethic camp, the court shall specify: (a) That upon completion of the
work ethic camp the offender shall be released on community custody for any
remaining time of total confinement; (b) the applicable conditions of
supervision on community custody status as required by RCW 9.94A.700(4) and
authorized by RCW 9.94A.700(5); and (c) that violation of the conditions may
result in a return to total confinement for the balance of the offender's
remaining time of confinement.

(3) The department
shall place the offender in the work ethic camp program, subject to capacity,
unless: (a) The department determines that the offender has physical or mental
impairments that would prevent participation and completion of the program; (b)
the department determines that the offender's custody level prevents placement
in the program; (c) the offender refuses to agree to the terms and conditions
of the program; (d) the offender has been found by the United States attorney
general to be subject to a deportation detainer or order; or (e) the offender
has participated in the work ethic camp program in the past.

(4) An offender who
fails to complete the work ethic camp program, who is administratively
terminated from the program, or who otherwise violates any conditions of
supervision, as defined by the department, shall be reclassified to serve the
unexpired term of his or her sentence as ordered by the sentencing court and
shall be subject to all rules relating to earned release time.

(5) During the last two
weeks prior to release from the work ethic camp program the department shall
provide the offender with comprehensive transition training.

(6) The department
may eliminate or terminate any term of community custody imposed by the court
under this section for an offender who is classified at the lowest risk level
pursuant to a risk assessment by the department. No liability may attach to
the state, the department, or any department employee based on the
determination to classify an offender at the lowest risk level, or to eliminate
or terminate a term of community custody, in the absence of intentional
misconduct. The decision to eliminate or terminate community custody shall not
affect the superior court's jurisdiction over the offender.

Sec. 6. RCW 9.94A.700 and 2000 c
28 s 22 are each amended to read as follows:

When a court sentences
an offender to a term of total confinement in the custody of the department for
any of the offenses specified in this section, the court shall also sentence
the offender to a term of community placement as provided in this section.

(1) The court shall
order a one-year term of community placement for the following:

(a) A sex offense or a
serious violent offense committed after July 1, 1988, but before July 1, 1990;
or

(b) An offense
committed on or after July 1, 1988, but before July 25, 1999, that is:

(i) Assault in the
second degree;

(ii) Assault of a child
in the second degree;

(iii) A crime against
persons where it is determined in accordance with RCW 9.94A.602 that the
offender or an accomplice was armed with a deadly weapon at the time of commission;
or

(iv) A felony offense
under chapter 69.50 or 69.52 RCW not sentenced under RCW 9.94A.660.

(2) The court shall
sentence the offender to a term of community placement of two years or up to
the period of earned release awarded pursuant to RCW 9.94A.728, whichever is
longer, for:

(a) An offense
categorized as a sex offense committed on or after July 1, 1990, but before
June 6, 1996, including those sex offenses also included in other offense
categories;

(b) A serious violent
offense other than a sex offense committed on or after July 1, 1990, but before
July 1, 2000; or

(c) A vehicular
homicide or vehicular assault committed on or after July 1, 1990, but before
July 1, 2000.

(3) The community
placement ordered under this section shall begin either upon completion of the
term of confinement or at such time as the offender is transferred to community
custody in lieu of earned release. When the court sentences an offender to the
statutory maximum sentence then the community placement portion of the sentence
shall consist entirely of the community custody to which the offender may
become eligible. Any period of community custody actually served shall be
credited against the community placement portion of the sentence.

(4) Unless a condition
is waived by the court, the terms of any community placement imposed under this
section shall include the following conditions:

(a) The offender shall
report to and be available for contact with the assigned community corrections
officer as directed;

(b) The offender shall
work at department-approved education, employment, or community service, or any
combination thereof;

(c) The offender shall
not possess or consume controlled substances except pursuant to lawfully issued
prescriptions;

(d) The offender shall
pay supervision fees as determined by the department; and

(e) The residence
location and living arrangements shall be subject to the prior approval of the
department during the period of community placement.

(5) As a part of any
terms of community placement imposed under this section, the court may also
order one or more of the following special conditions:

(a) The offender shall
remain within, or outside of, a specified geographical boundary;

(b) The offender shall
not have direct or indirect contact with the victim of the crime or a specified
class of individuals;

(c) The offender shall
participate in crime-related treatment or counseling services;

(d) The offender shall
not consume alcohol; or

(e) The offender shall
comply with any crime-related prohibitions.

(6) An offender
convicted of a felony sex offense against a minor victim after June 6, 1996,
shall comply with any terms and conditions of community placement imposed by
the department relating to contact between the sex offender and a minor victim
or a child of similar age or circumstance as a previous victim.

(7) Prior to or during
community placement, upon recommendation of the department, the sentencing
court may remove or modify any conditions of community placement so as not to
be more restrictive.

(8) The department
may eliminate or terminate any term of community placement or community custody
imposed by the court under this section for an offender who is classified at
the lowest risk level pursuant to a risk assessment by the department. No
liability may attach to the state, the department, or any department employee
based on the determination to classify an offender at the lowest risk level, or
to eliminate or terminate a term of community placement or community custody,
in the absence of intentional misconduct. The decision to eliminate or
terminate community placement or community custody shall not affect the
superior court's jurisdiction over the offender.

Sec. 7. RCW 9.94A.705 and 2000 c
28 s 23 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) Except for
persons sentenced under RCW 9.94A.700(2) or 9.94A.710, when a court sentences a
person to a term of total confinement to the custody of the department for a
violent offense, any crime against persons under RCW 9.94A.411(2), or any
felony offense under chapter 69.50 or 69.52 RCW not sentenced under RCW
9.94A.660, committed on or after July 25, 1999, but before July 1, 2000, the
court shall in addition to the other terms of the sentence, sentence the
offender to a one-year term of community placement beginning either upon
completion of the term of confinement or at such time as the offender is
transferred to community custody in lieu of earned release in accordance with
RCW 9.94A.728 (1) and (2). When the court sentences the offender under this
section to the statutory maximum period of confinement, then the community
placement portion of the sentence shall consist entirely of such community
custody to which the offender may become eligible, in accordance with RCW
9.94A.728 (1) and (2). Any period of community custody actually served shall
be credited against the community placement portion of the sentence.

(2) The department
may eliminate or terminate any term of community placement or community custody
imposed by the court under this section for an offender who is classified at
the lowest risk level pursuant to a risk assessment by the department. No
liability may attach to the state, the department, or any department employee
based on the determination to classify an offender at the lowest risk level, or
to eliminate or terminate a term of community placement or community custody,
in the absence of intentional misconduct. The decision to eliminate or
terminate community placement or community custody shall not affect the superior
court's jurisdiction over the offender.

Sec. 8. RCW 9.94A.715 and 2001
2nd sp.s. c 12 s 302 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) When a court
sentences a person to the custody of the department for a sex offense not
sentenced under RCW 9.94A.712, a violent offense, any crime against persons
under RCW 9.94A.411(2), or a felony offense under chapter 69.50 or 69.52 RCW,
committed on or after July 1, 2000, the court shall in addition to the other
terms of the sentence, sentence the offender to community custody for the
community custody range established under RCW 9.94A.850 or up to the period of
earned release awarded pursuant to RCW 9.94A.728 (1) and (2), whichever is
longer. The community custody shall begin: (a) Upon completion of the term of
confinement; (b) at such time as the offender is transferred to community
custody in lieu of earned release in accordance with RCW 9.94A.728 (1) and (2);
or (c) with regard to offenders sentenced under RCW 9.94A.660, upon failure to
complete or administrative termination from the special drug offender
sentencing alternative program.

(2)(a) Unless a
condition is waived by the court, the conditions of community custody shall
include those provided for in RCW 9.94A.700(4). The conditions may also
include those provided for in RCW 9.94A.700(5). The court may also order the
offender to participate in rehabilitative programs or otherwise perform
affirmative conduct reasonably related to the circumstances of the offense, the
offender's risk of reoffending, or the safety of the community, and the
department shall enforce such conditions pursuant to subsection (6) of this
section.

(b) As part of any
sentence that includes a term of community custody imposed under this
subsection, the court shall also require the offender to comply with any
conditions imposed by the department under RCW 9.94A.720. The department shall
assess the offender's risk of reoffense and may establish and modify additional
conditions of the offender's community custody based upon the risk to community
safety. In addition, the department may require the offender to participate in
rehabilitative programs, or otherwise perform affirmative conduct, and to obey
all laws.

(c) The department may
not impose conditions that are contrary to those ordered by the court and may
not contravene or decrease court imposed conditions except as authorized
under subsection (8) of this section. The department shall notify the
offender in writing of any such conditions or modifications. In setting,
modifying, and enforcing conditions of community custody, the department shall
be deemed to be performing a quasi-judicial function.

(3) If an offender
violates conditions imposed by the court or the department pursuant to this
section during community custody, the department may transfer the offender to a
more restrictive confinement status and impose other available sanctions as
provided in RCW 9.94A.737 and 9.94A.740.

(4) Except for terms of
community custody under RCW 9.94A.670, the department shall discharge the
offender from community custody on a date determined by the department, which
the department may modify, based on risk and performance of the offender,
within the range or at the end of the period of earned release, whichever is
later.

(5) At any time prior
to the completion or termination of a sex offender's term of community custody,
if the court finds that public safety would be enhanced, the court may impose
and enforce an order extending any or all of the conditions imposed pursuant to
this section for a period up to the maximum allowable sentence for the crime as
it is classified in chapter 9A.20 RCW, regardless of the expiration of the
offender's term of community custody. If a violation of a condition extended
under this subsection occurs after the expiration of the offender's term of
community custody, it shall be deemed a violation of the sentence for the
purposes of RCW 9.94A.631 and may be punishable as contempt of court as
provided for in RCW 7.21.040. If the court extends a condition beyond the
expiration of the term of community custody, the department is not responsible
for supervision of the offender's compliance with the condition.

(6) Within the funds
available for community custody, the department shall determine conditions and
duration of community custody on the basis of risk to community safety, and
shall supervise offenders during community custody on the basis of risk to
community safety and conditions imposed by the court. The secretary shall
adopt rules to implement the provisions of this subsection.

(7) By the close of the
next business day after receiving notice of a condition imposed or modified by
the department, an offender may request an administrative review under rules
adopted by the department. The condition shall remain in effect unless the
reviewing officer finds that it is not reasonably related to any of the
following: (a) The crime of conviction; (b) the offender's risk of
reoffending; or (c) the safety of the community.

(8) Except for terms
of community custody imposed under RCW 9.94A.660 and 9.94A.670 or imposed upon
a person convicted of a sex offense, the department may eliminate or terminate
any term of community custody imposed by the court under this section for an
offender who is classified at the lowest risk level pursuant to a risk
assessment by the department. No liability may attach to the state, the
department, or any department employee based on the determination to classify
an offender at the lowest risk level, or to eliminate or terminate a term of
community custody, in the absence of intentional misconduct. The decision to
eliminate or terminate community custody shall not affect the superior court's
jurisdiction over the offender.

Sec. 9. RCW 9.94A.720 and 2000 c
28 s 26 are each amended to read as follows:

(1)(a) Except as
provided in RCW 9.94A.545(2), 9.94A.650(5), 9.94A.690(6), 9.94A.700(8),
9.94A.705(2), and 9.94A.715(8), all offenders sentenced to terms involving
community supervision, ((community service,)) community placement, or
community custody((, or legal financial obligation)) shall be under the
supervision of the department and shall follow explicitly the instructions and
conditions of the department. The department may require an offender to
perform affirmative acts it deems appropriate to monitor compliance with the
conditions of the sentence imposed.

(b) The instructions
shall include, at a minimum, reporting as directed to a community corrections
officer, remaining within prescribed geographical boundaries, notifying the
community corrections officer of any change in the offender's address or
employment, and paying the supervision fee assessment.

(c) For offenders
sentenced to terms involving community custody for crimes committed on or after
June 6, 1996, the department may include, in addition to the instructions in (b)
of this subsection, any appropriate conditions of supervision, including but
not limited to, prohibiting the offender from having contact with any other
specified individuals or specific class of individuals.

(d) For offenders
sentenced to terms of community custody for crimes committed on or after July
1, 2000, the department may impose conditions as specified in RCW 9.94A.715.

The conditions
authorized under (c) of this subsection may be imposed by the department prior
to or during an offender's community custody term. If a violation of
conditions imposed by the court or the department pursuant to RCW 9.94A.710
occurs during community custody, it shall be deemed a violation of community
placement for the purposes of RCW 9.94A.740 and shall authorize the department
to transfer an offender to a more restrictive confinement status as provided in
RCW 9.94A.737. At any time prior to the completion of an offender's term of
community custody, the department may recommend to the court that any or all of
the conditions imposed by the court or the department pursuant to RCW 9.94A.710
or 9.94A.715 be continued beyond the expiration of the offender's term of
community custody as authorized in RCW 9.94A.715 (3) or (5).

The department may
require offenders to pay for special services rendered on or after July 25,
1993, including electronic monitoring, day reporting, and telephone reporting,
dependent upon the offender's ability to pay. The department may pay for these
services for offenders who are not able to pay.

(2) No
offender sentenced to terms involving community supervision, community service,
community custody, or community placement under the supervision of the
department may own, use, or possess firearms or ammunition. Offenders who own,
use, or are found to be in actual or constructive possession of firearms or
ammunition shall be subject to the violation process and sanctions under RCW
9.94A.634, 9.94A.737, and 9.94A.740. "Constructive possession" as
used in this subsection means the power and intent to control the firearm or
ammunition. "Firearm" as used in this subsection has the same
definition as in RCW 9.41.010.

Sec. 10. RCW 9.94A.740 and 1999 c
196 s 9 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) The secretary may
issue warrants for the arrest of any offender who violates a condition of
community placement or community custody. The arrest warrants shall authorize
any law enforcement or peace officer or community corrections officer of this
state or any other state where such offender may be located, to arrest the
offender and place him or her in total confinement pending disposition of the
alleged violation. The department shall compensate the local jurisdiction at
the office of financial management's adjudicated rate, in accordance with RCW
70.48.440. A community corrections officer, if he or she has reasonable cause
to believe an offender in community placement or community custody has violated
a condition of community placement or community custody, may suspend the
person's community placement or community custody status and arrest or cause
the arrest and detention in total confinement of the offender, pending the
determination of the secretary as to whether the violation has occurred. The
community corrections officer shall report to the secretary all facts and
circumstances and the reasons for the action of suspending community placement
or community custody status. A violation of a condition of community placement
or community custody shall be deemed a violation of the sentence for purposes
of RCW 9.94A.631. The authority granted to community corrections officers under
this section shall be in addition to that set forth in RCW 9.94A.631. Community
corrections officers have no obligation to arrest and detain an offender, or to
report a violation to the superior court, where the department has eliminated
or terminated supervision pursuant to RCW 9.94A.545, 9.94A.650, 9.94A.690,
9.94A.700, 9.94A.705, and 9.94A.715.

(2) Inmates, as defined
in RCW 72.09.015, who have been transferred to community custody and who are
detained in a local correctional facility are the financial responsibility of
the department of corrections, except as provided in subsection (3) of this
section. The community custody inmate shall be removed from the local
correctional facility, except as provided in subsection (3) of this section,
not later than eight days, excluding weekends and holidays, following
admittance to the local correctional facility and notification that the inmate
is available for movement to a state correctional institution.

(3) The department may
negotiate with local correctional authorities for an additional period of
detention; however, sex offenders sanctioned for community custody violations
under RCW 9.94A.737(2) to a term of confinement shall remain in the local
correctional facility for the complete term of the sanction. For confinement
sanctions imposed under RCW 9.94A.737(2)(a), the local correctional facility
shall be financially responsible. For confinement sanctions imposed under RCW
9.94A.737(2)(b), the department of corrections shall be financially responsible
for that portion of the sanction served during the time in which the sex
offender is on community custody in lieu of earned release, and the local
correctional facility shall be financially responsible for that portion of the
sanction served by the sex offender after the time in which the sex offender is
on community custody in lieu of earned release. The department, in
consultation with the Washington association of sheriffs and police chiefs and
those counties in which the sheriff does not operate a correctional facility,
shall establish a methodology for determining the department's local
correctional facilities bed utilization rate, for each county in calendar year
1998, for offenders being held for violations of conditions of community
custody, community placement, or community supervision. For confinement
sanctions imposed under RCW 9.94A.737(2) (c) or (d), the local correctional
facility shall continue to be financially responsible to the extent of the
calendar year 1998 bed utilization rate. If the department's use of bed space
in local correctional facilities of any county for confinement sanctions
imposed on offenders sentenced to a term of community custody under RCW
9.94A.737(2) (c) or (d) exceeds the 1998 bed utilization rate for the county, the
department shall compensate the county for the excess use at the per diem rate
equal to the lowest rate charged by the county under its contract with a
municipal government during the year in which the use occurs.

Sec. 11. RCW 9.94A.750 and 2000 c
28 s 32 are each amended to read as follows:

This section applies to
offenses committed on or before July 1, 1985.

(1) If restitution is
ordered, the court shall determine the amount of restitution due at the
sentencing hearing or within one hundred eighty days. The court may continue
the hearing beyond the one hundred eighty days for good cause. The court shall
then set a minimum monthly payment that the offender is required to make
towards the restitution that is ordered. The court should take into
consideration the total amount of the restitution owed, the offender's present,
past, and future ability to pay, as well as any assets that the offender may
have.

(2) During the period
of supervision, the community corrections officer may examine the offender to
determine if there has been a change in circumstances that warrants an
amendment of the monthly payment schedule. The community corrections officer
may recommend a change to the schedule of payment and shall inform the court of
the recommended change and the reasons for the change. The sentencing court
may then reset the monthly minimum payments based on the report from the
community corrections officer of the change in circumstances.

(3) Except as provided
in subsection (6) of this section, restitution ordered by a court pursuant to a
criminal conviction shall be based on easily ascertainable damages for injury
to or loss of property, actual expenses incurred for treatment for injury to
persons, and lost wages resulting from injury. Restitution shall not include
reimbursement for damages for mental anguish, pain and suffering, or other
intangible losses, but may include the costs of counseling reasonably related
to the offense. The amount of restitution shall not exceed double the amount
of the offender's gain or the victim's loss from the commission of the offense.

(4) For the purposes of
this section, the offender shall remain under the court's jurisdiction for a
term of ten years following the offender's release from total confinement or
ten years subsequent to the entry of the judgment and sentence, whichever
period is longer. Prior to the expiration of the initial ten-year period, the
superior court may extend jurisdiction under the criminal judgment an
additional ten years for payment of restitution. ((If jurisdiction under
the criminal judgment is extended, the department is not responsible for
supervision of the offender during the subsequent period.)) The portion of
the sentence concerning restitution may be modified as to amount, terms and
conditions during either the initial ten-year period or subsequent ten-year
period if the criminal judgment is extended, regardless of the expiration of
the offender's term of community supervision and regardless of the statutory
maximum sentence for the crime. The court may not reduce the total amount of
restitution ordered because the offender may lack the ability to pay the total
amount. The offender's compliance with the restitution ((shall)) may
be supervised by the department during any term of community placement,
community custody, or community supervision. The department is not responsible
for supervision of the offender during any subsequent period of time the
offender remains under the court's jurisdiction.

(5) Restitution may be
ordered whenever the offender is convicted of an offense which results in
injury to any person or damage to or loss of property or as provided in
subsection (6) of this section. In addition, restitution may be ordered to pay
for an injury, loss, or damage if the offender pleads guilty to a lesser
offense or fewer offenses and agrees with the prosecutor's recommendation that
the offender be required to pay restitution to a victim of an offense or
offenses which are not prosecuted pursuant to a plea agreement.

(6) Restitution for the
crime of rape of a child in the first, second, or third degree, in which the
victim becomes pregnant, shall include: (a) All of the victim's medical
expenses that are associated with the rape and resulting pregnancy; and (b)
child support for any child born as a result of the rape if child support is
ordered pursuant to a proceeding in superior court or administrative order for
support for that child. The clerk must forward any restitution payments made
on behalf of the victim's child to the Washington state child support registry
under chapter 26.23 RCW. Identifying information about the victim and child
shall not be included in the order. The offender shall receive a credit
against any obligation owing under the administrative or superior court order
for support of the victim's child. For the purposes of this subsection, the
offender shall remain under the court's jurisdiction until the offender has
satisfied support obligations under the superior court or administrative order
but not longer than a maximum term of twenty-five years following the
offender's release from total confinement or twenty-five years subsequent to
the entry of the judgment and sentence, whichever period is longer. The court
may not reduce the total amount of restitution ordered because the offender may
lack the ability to pay the total amount. The department ((shall)) may
supervise the offender's compliance with the restitution ordered under this
subsection during any term of community placement, community custody, or
community supervision. The department is not responsible for supervision of
the offender during any subsequent period of time the offender remains under
the court's jurisdiction.

(7) In addition to any
sentence that may be imposed, an offender who has been found guilty of an
offense involving fraud or other deceptive practice or an organization which
has been found guilty of any such offense may be ordered by the sentencing
court to give notice of the conviction to the class of persons or to the sector
of the public affected by the conviction or financially interested in the
subject matter of the offense by mail, by advertising in designated areas or
through designated media, or by other appropriate means.

(8) This section does
not limit civil remedies or defenses available to the victim or offender
including support enforcement remedies for support ordered under subsection (6)
of this section for a child born as a result of a rape of a child victim. The court
shall identify in the judgment and sentence the victim or victims entitled to
restitution and what amount is due each victim. The state or victim may
enforce the court-ordered restitution in the same manner as a judgment in a
civil action. Restitution collected through civil enforcement must be paid
through the registry of the court and must be distributed proportionately
according to each victim's loss when there is more than one victim.

Sec. 12. RCW 9.94A.753 and 2000 c
226 s 3 and 2000 c 28 s 33 are each reenacted and amended to read as follows:

This section applies to
offenses committed after July 1, 1985.

(1) When restitution is
ordered, the court shall determine the amount of restitution due at the
sentencing hearing or within one hundred eighty days except as provided in
subsection (7) of this section. The court may continue the hearing beyond the
one hundred eighty days for good cause. The court shall then set a minimum
monthly payment that the offender is required to make towards the restitution
that is ordered. The court should take into consideration the total amount of
the restitution owed, the offender's present, past, and future ability to pay,
as well as any assets that the offender may have.

(2) During the period
of supervision, the community corrections officer may examine the offender to
determine if there has been a change in circumstances that warrants an
amendment of the monthly payment schedule. The community corrections officer
may recommend a change to the schedule of payment and shall inform the court of
the recommended change and the reasons for the change. The sentencing court
may then reset the monthly minimum payments based on the report from the
community corrections officer of the change in circumstances.

(3) Except as provided
in subsection (6) of this section, restitution ordered by a court pursuant to a
criminal conviction shall be based on easily ascertainable damages for injury
to or loss of property, actual expenses incurred for treatment for injury to
persons, and lost wages resulting from injury. Restitution shall not include
reimbursement for damages for mental anguish, pain and suffering, or other
intangible losses, but may include the costs of counseling reasonably related
to the offense. The amount of restitution shall not exceed double the amount
of the offender's gain or the victim's loss from the commission of the crime.

(4) For the purposes of
this section, for an offense committed prior to July 1, 2000, the offender shall
remain under the court's jurisdiction for a term of ten years following the
offender's release from total confinement or ten years subsequent to the entry
of the judgment and sentence, whichever period ends later. Prior to the
expiration of the initial ten-year period, the superior court may extend
jurisdiction under the criminal judgment an additional ten years for payment of
restitution. For an offense committed on or after July 1, 2000, the offender
shall remain under the court's jurisdiction until the obligation is completely
satisfied, regardless of the statutory maximum for the crime. The portion of
the sentence concerning restitution may be modified as to amount, terms, and
conditions during any period of time the offender remains under the court's
jurisdiction, regardless of the expiration of the offender's term of community
supervision and regardless of the statutory maximum sentence for the crime.
The court may not reduce the total amount of restitution ordered because the
offender may lack the ability to pay the total amount. The offender's
compliance with the restitution ((shall)) may be supervised by
the department ((for ten years following the entry of the judgment and
sentence or ten years following the offender's release from total confinement))
during any term of community placement, community custody, or community
supervision. The department is not responsible for supervision of the
offender during any subsequent period of time the offender remains under the
court's jurisdiction.

(5) Restitution shall
be ordered whenever the offender is convicted of an offense which results in
injury to any person or damage to or loss of property or as provided in
subsection (6) of this section unless extraordinary circumstances exist which
make restitution inappropriate in the court's judgment and the court sets forth
such circumstances in the record. In addition, restitution shall be ordered to
pay for an injury, loss, or damage if the offender pleads guilty to a lesser
offense or fewer offenses and agrees with the prosecutor's recommendation that
the offender be required to pay restitution to a victim of an offense or
offenses which are not prosecuted pursuant to a plea agreement.

(6) Restitution for the
crime of rape of a child in the first, second, or third degree, in which the
victim becomes pregnant, shall include: (a) All of the victim's medical
expenses that are associated with the rape and resulting pregnancy; and (b)
child support for any child born as a result of the rape if child support is
ordered pursuant to a civil superior court or administrative order for support
for that child. The clerk must forward any restitution payments made on behalf
of the victim's child to the Washington state child support registry under
chapter 26.23 RCW. Identifying information about the victim and child shall
not be included in the order. The offender shall receive a credit against any
obligation owing under the administrative or superior court order for support
of the victim's child. For the purposes of this subsection, the offender shall
remain under the court's jurisdiction until the offender has satisfied support
obligations under the superior court or administrative order for the period
provided in RCW 4.16.020 or a maximum term of twenty-five years following the
offender's release from total confinement or twenty-five years subsequent to
the entry of the judgment and sentence, whichever period is longer. The court
may not reduce the total amount of restitution ordered because the offender may
lack the ability to pay the total amount. The department ((shall)) may
supervise the offender's compliance with the restitution ordered under this
subsection during any term of community placement, community custody, or
community supervision. The department is not responsible for supervision of
the offender during any subsequent period of time the offender remains under
the court's jurisdiction.

(7) Regardless of the
provisions of subsections (1) through (6) of this section, the court shall
order restitution in all cases where the victim is entitled to benefits under
the crime victims' compensation act, chapter 7.68 RCW. If the court does not
order restitution and the victim of the crime has been determined to be
entitled to benefits under the crime victims' compensation act, the department
of labor and industries, as administrator of the crime victims' compensation
program, may petition the court within one year of entry of the judgment and
sentence for entry of a restitution order. Upon receipt of a petition from the
department of labor and industries, the court shall hold a restitution hearing
and shall enter a restitution order.

(8) In addition to any
sentence that may be imposed, an offender who has been found guilty of an
offense involving fraud or other deceptive practice or an organization which
has been found guilty of any such offense may be ordered by the sentencing
court to give notice of the conviction to the class of persons or to the sector
of the public affected by the conviction or financially interested in the
subject matter of the offense by mail, by advertising in designated areas or
through designated media, or by other appropriate means.

(9) This section does
not limit civil remedies or defenses available to the victim, survivors of the
victim, or offender including support enforcement remedies for support ordered
under subsection (6) of this section for a child born as a result of a rape of
a child victim. The court shall identify in the judgment and sentence the
victim or victims entitled to restitution and what amount is due each victim.
The state or victim may enforce the court-ordered restitution in the same
manner as a judgment in a civil action. Restitution collected through civil
enforcement must be paid through the registry of the court and must be
distributed proportionately according to each victim's loss when there is more
than one victim.

Sec. 13. RCW 9.94A.760 and 2001 c
10 s 3 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) Whenever a person
is convicted of a felony, the court may order the payment of a legal financial
obligation as part of the sentence. The court must on either the judgment and
sentence or on a subsequent order to pay, designate the total amount of a legal
financial obligation and segregate this amount among the separate assessments
made for restitution, costs, fines, and other assessments required by law. On
the same order, the court is also to set a sum that the offender is required to
pay on a monthly basis towards satisfying the legal financial obligation. If
the court fails to set the offender monthly payment amount, the department
shall set the amount. Upon receipt of an offender's monthly payment,
restitution shall be paid prior to any payments of other monetary obligations.
After restitution is satisfied, the county clerk shall distribute the payment
proportionally among all other fines, costs, and assessments imposed, unless
otherwise ordered by the court.

(2) If the court
determines that the offender, at the time of sentencing, has the means to pay
for the cost of incarceration, the court may require the offender to pay for
the cost of incarceration at a rate of fifty dollars per day of incarceration.
Payment of other court-ordered financial obligations, including all legal
financial obligations and costs of supervision shall take precedence over the
payment of the cost of incarceration ordered by the court. All funds recovered
from offenders for the cost of incarceration in the county jail shall be
remitted to the county and the costs of incarceration in a prison shall be
remitted to the department.

(3) The court may add
to the judgment and sentence or subsequent order to pay a statement that a
notice of payroll deduction is to be issued immediately. If the court chooses
not to order the immediate issuance of a notice of payroll deduction at
sentencing, the court shall add to the judgment and sentence or subsequent
order to pay a statement that a notice of payroll deduction may be issued or
other income-withholding action may be taken, without further notice to the
offender if a monthly court-ordered legal financial obligation payment is not
paid when due, and an amount equal to or greater than the amount payable for
one month is owed.

If a judgment and
sentence or subsequent order to pay does not include the statement that a
notice of payroll deduction may be issued or other income-withholding action
may be taken if a monthly legal financial obligation payment is past due, the
department may serve a notice on the offender stating such requirements and
authorizations. Service shall be by personal service or any form of mail
requiring a return receipt.

(4) Independent of the
department, the party or entity to whom the legal financial obligation is owed
shall have the authority to use any other remedies available to the party or
entity to collect the legal financial obligation. These remedies include
enforcement in the same manner as a judgment in a civil action by the party or
entity to whom the legal financial obligation is owed. Restitution collected
through civil enforcement must be paid through the registry of the court and
must be distributed proportionately according to each victim's loss when there
is more than one victim. The judgment and sentence shall identify the party or
entity to whom restitution is owed so that the state, party, or entity may
enforce the judgment. If restitution is ordered pursuant to RCW 9.94A.750(6)
or 9.94A.753(6) to a victim of rape of a child or a victim's child born from
the rape, the Washington state child support registry shall be identified as
the party to whom payments must be made. Restitution obligations arising from
the rape of a child in the first, second, or third degree that result in the
pregnancy of the victim may be enforced for the time periods provided under RCW
9.94A.750(6) and 9.94A.753(6). All other legal financial obligations for an
offense committed prior to July 1, 2000, may be enforced at any time during the
ten-year period following the offender's release from total confinement or
within ten years of entry of the judgment and sentence, whichever period ends
later. Prior to the expiration of the initial ten-year period, the superior
court may extend the criminal judgment an additional ten years for payment of legal
financial obligations including crime victims' assessments. All other legal
financial obligations for an offense committed on or after July 1, 2000, may be
enforced at any time the offender remains under the court's jurisdiction. For
an offense committed on or after July 1, 2000, the court shall retain
jurisdiction over the offender, for purposes of the offender's compliance with
payment of the legal financial obligations, until the obligation is completely
satisfied, regardless of the statutory maximum for the crime. The department
of corrections ((shall)) may supervise the offender's compliance
with payment of the legal financial obligations ((for ten years following
the entry of the judgment and sentence, or ten years following the offender's
release from total confinement, whichever period ends later)) during any
term of community placement, community custody, or community supervision.
The department is not responsible for supervision of the offender during any
subsequent period of time the offender remains under the court's jurisdiction.

(5) In order to assist
the court in setting a monthly sum that the offender must pay during the period
of supervision, the offender is required to report to the department for
purposes of preparing a recommendation to the court. When reporting, the
offender is required, under oath, to respond truthfully and honestly to all
questions concerning present, past, and future earning capabilities and the
location and nature of all property or financial assets. The offender is
further required to bring all documents requested by the department.

(6) After completing
the investigation, the department shall make a report to the court on the
amount of the monthly payment that the offender should be required to make
towards a satisfied legal financial obligation.

(7) During the period
of supervision, the department may make a recommendation to the court that the
offender's monthly payment schedule be modified so as to reflect a change in
financial circumstances. If the department sets the monthly payment amount,
the department may modify the monthly payment amount without the matter being
returned to the court. During the period of supervision, the department may
require the offender to report to the department for the purposes of reviewing
the appropriateness of the collection schedule for the legal financial
obligation. During this reporting, the offender is required under oath to
respond truthfully and honestly to all questions concerning earning
capabilities and the location and nature of all property or financial assets.
The offender shall bring all documents requested by the department in order to
prepare the collection schedule.

(8) After the judgment
and sentence or payment order is entered, the department is authorized, for any
period of supervision, to collect the legal financial obligation from the
offender. Any amount collected by the department shall be remitted daily to
the county clerk for the purpose of disbursements. The department is
authorized to accept credit cards as payment for a legal financial obligation,
and any costs incurred related to accepting credit card payments shall be the
responsibility of the offender.

(9) The department or
any obligee of the legal financial obligation may seek a mandatory wage
assignment for the purposes of obtaining satisfaction for the legal financial
obligation pursuant to RCW 9.94A.7701.

(10) The requirement
that the offender pay a monthly sum towards a legal financial obligation
constitutes a condition or requirement of a sentence and the offender is
subject to the penalties for noncompliance as provided in RCW 9.94A.634,
9.94A.737, or 9.94A.740.

(11) The county clerk
shall provide the department with individualized monthly billings for each
offender with an unsatisfied legal financial obligation and shall provide the
department with notice of payments by such offenders no less frequently than
weekly.

(12) The department may
arrange for the collection of unpaid legal financial obligations through the
county clerk, or through another entity if the clerk does not assume
responsibility for collection. The costs for collection services shall be paid
by the offender.

(13) Nothing in this
chapter makes the department, the state, or any of its employees, agents, or
other persons acting on their behalf liable under any circumstances for the
payment of these legal financial obligations.

Sec. 14. RCW 9.92.060 and 1996 c
298 s 5 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) Whenever any person
is convicted of any crime except murder, burglary in the first degree, arson in
the first degree, robbery, rape of a child, or rape, the superior court may, in
its discretion, at the time of imposing sentence upon such person, direct that
such sentence be stayed and suspended until otherwise ordered by the superior
court, and that the sentenced person be placed under the charge of a community
corrections officer employed by the department of corrections, or if the county
elects to assume responsibility for the supervision of all superior court
misdemeanant probationers a probation officer employed or contracted for by the
county, upon such terms as the superior court may determine.

(2) As a condition to
suspension of sentence, the superior court shall require the payment of the
penalty assessment required by RCW 7.68.035. In addition, the superior court
may require the convicted person to make such monetary payments, on such terms
as the superior court deems appropriate under the circumstances, as are
necessary: (a) To comply with any order of the court for the payment of family
support; (b) to make restitution to any person or persons who may have suffered
loss or damage by reason of the commission of the crime in question or when the
offender pleads guilty to a lesser offense or fewer offenses and agrees with
the prosecutor's recommendation that the offender be required to pay restitution
to a victim of an offense or offenses which are not prosecuted pursuant to a
plea agreement; (c) to pay any fine imposed and not suspended and the court or
other costs incurred in the prosecution of the case, including reimbursement of
the state for costs of extradition if return to this state by extradition was
required; and (d) to contribute to a county or interlocal drug fund.

(3) As a condition of
the suspended sentence, the superior court may order the probationer to report
to the secretary of corrections or such officer as the secretary may designate
and as a condition of the probation to follow the instructions of the
secretary. If the county legislative authority has elected to assume
responsibility for the supervision of superior court misdemeanant probationers
within its jurisdiction, the superior court misdemeanant probationer shall
report to a probation officer employed or contracted for by the county. In
cases where a superior court misdemeanant probationer is sentenced in one
county, but resides within another county, there must be provisions for the
probationer to report to the agency having supervision responsibility for the
probationer's county of residence.

(4) If restitution to
the victim has been ordered under subsection (2)(b) of this section and the
superior court has ordered supervision, the officer supervising the probationer
shall make a reasonable effort to ascertain whether restitution has been made
as ordered. If the superior court has ordered supervision and restitution has
not been made, the officer shall inform the prosecutor of that violation of the
terms of the suspended sentence not less than three months prior to the
termination of the suspended sentence.

(5) In cases where
the court has ordered supervision as a condition of probation, the department
of corrections may eliminate or terminate the supervision, including
supervision for payment of restitution or legal financial obligations, if the
department has classified the offender at the lowest risk level pursuant to a
risk assessment. No liability shall attach to the state, the department, or
any department employee based on the determination to classify an offender at
the lowest risk level, or to eliminate or terminate supervision, in the absence
of intentional misconduct. The decision to eliminate or terminate supervision
shall not affect the superior court's jurisdiction over the offender.

Sec. 15. RCW 9.95.204 and 1996 c
298 s 1 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) When a superior
court places a defendant convicted of a misdemeanor or gross misdemeanor on
probation and orders supervision under RCW 9.92.060 or 9.95.210, the department
of corrections has initial responsibility for supervision of that defendant. The
department may eliminate or terminate supervision, including supervision for
payment of restitution or legal financial obligations, if the department has
classified the offender at the lowest risk level pursuant to a risk
assessment. No liability shall attach to the state, the department, or any
department employee based on the determination to classify an offender at the
lowest risk level, or to eliminate or terminate supervision, in the absence of
intentional misconduct. The decision to eliminate or terminate supervision
shall not affect the superior court's jurisdiction over the offender.

(2) A county
legislative authority may assume responsibility for the supervision of all
defendants within its jurisdiction who have been convicted of a misdemeanor or
gross misdemeanor and sentenced to probation by a superior court. The
assumption of responsibility shall be made by contract with the department of
corrections on a biennial basis.

(3) If a county assumes
supervision responsibility, the county shall supervise all superior court
misdemeanant probationers within that county for the duration of the biennium,
as set forth in the contract with the department of corrections.

(4) A contract between
a county legislative authority and the department of corrections for the transfer
of supervision responsibility must include, at a minimum, the following
provisions:

(a) The county's
agreement to supervise all misdemeanant probationers who are sentenced by a
superior court within that county and who reside within that county;

(b) A reciprocal
agreement regarding the supervision of superior court misdemeanant probationers
sentenced in one county but who reside in another county;

(c) The county's
agreement to comply with the minimum standards for classification and
supervision of offenders as required under RCW 9.95.206;

(d) The amount of funds
available from the department of corrections to the county for supervision of
superior court misdemeanant probationers, calculated according to a formula
established by the department of corrections;

(e) A method for the
payment of funds by the department of corrections to the county;

(f) The county's
agreement that any funds received by the county under the contract will be
expended only to cover costs of supervision of superior court misdemeanant
probationers;

(g) The county's
agreement to account to the department of corrections for the expenditure of
all funds received under the contract and to submit to audits for compliance
with the supervision standards and financial requirements of this section;

(h) Provisions
regarding rights and remedies in the event of a possible breach of contract or
default by either party; and

(i) Provisions allowing
for voluntary termination of the contract by either party, with good cause,
after sixty days' written notice.

(5) If the contract
between the county and the department of corrections is terminated for any
reason, the department of corrections shall reassume responsibility for supervision
of superior court misdemeanant probationers within that county, unless the
department has terminated supervision pursuant to subsection (1) of this
section. In such an event, the department of corrections retains any and
all rights and remedies available by law and under the contract.

(6) The state of
Washington, the department of corrections and its employees, community
corrections officers, and volunteers who assist community corrections officers
are not liable for any harm caused by the actions of a superior court
misdemeanant probationer who is under the supervision of a county. A county,
its probation department and employees, probation officers, and volunteers who
assist probation officers are not liable for any harm caused by the actions of
a superior court misdemeanant probationer who is under the supervision of the
department of corrections. This subsection applies regardless of whether the
supervising entity is in compliance with the standards of supervision at the
time of the misdemeanant probationer's actions.

(7) The state of
Washington, the department of corrections and its employees, community
corrections officers, any county under contract with the department of
corrections pursuant to this section and its employees, probation officers, and
volunteers who assist community corrections officers and probation officers in
the superior court misdemeanant probation program are not liable for civil
damages resulting from any act or omission in the rendering of superior court
misdemeanant probation activities unless the act or omission constitutes gross
negligence. For purposes of this section, "volunteers" is defined
according to RCW 51.12.035.

Sec. 16. RCW 9.95.210 and 1996 c
298 s 3 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) In granting
probation, the superior court may suspend the imposition or the execution of
the sentence and may direct that the suspension may continue upon such
conditions and for such time as it shall designate, not exceeding the maximum
term of sentence or two years, whichever is longer.

(2) In the order
granting probation and as a condition thereof, the superior court may in its
discretion imprison the defendant in the county jail for a period not exceeding
one year and may fine the defendant any sum not exceeding the statutory limit
for the offense committed, and court costs. As a condition of probation, the
superior court shall require the payment of the penalty assessment required by
RCW 7.68.035. The superior court may also require the defendant to make such
monetary payments, on such terms as it deems appropriate under the
circumstances, as are necessary: (a) To comply with any order of the court for
the payment of family support; (b) to make restitution to any person or persons
who may have suffered loss or damage by reason of the commission of the crime
in question or when the offender pleads guilty to a lesser offense or fewer
offenses and agrees with the prosecutor's recommendation that the offender be
required to pay restitution to a victim of an offense or offenses which are not
prosecuted pursuant to a plea agreement; (c) to pay such fine as may be imposed
and court costs, including reimbursement of the state for costs of extradition
if return to this state by extradition was required; (d) following
consideration of the financial condition of the person subject to possible
electronic monitoring, to pay for the costs of electronic monitoring if that
monitoring was required by the court as a condition of release from custody or
as a condition of probation; (e) to contribute to a county or interlocal drug
fund; and (f) to make restitution to a public agency for the costs of an
emergency response under RCW 38.52.430, and may require bonds for the faithful
observance of any and all conditions imposed in the probation.

(3) The superior court
shall order restitution in all cases where the victim is entitled to benefits
under the crime victims' compensation act, chapter 7.68 RCW. If the superior
court does not order restitution and the victim of the crime has been
determined to be entitled to benefits under the crime victims' compensation
act, the department of labor and industries, as administrator of the crime
victims' compensation program, may petition the superior court within one year
of imposition of the sentence for entry of a restitution order. Upon receipt
of a petition from the department of labor and industries, the superior court shall
hold a restitution hearing and shall enter a restitution order.

(4) In granting
probation, the superior court may order the probationer to report to the
secretary of corrections or such officer as the secretary may designate and as
a condition of the probation to follow the instructions of the secretary. If
the county legislative authority has elected to assume responsibility for the
supervision of superior court misdemeanant probationers within its
jurisdiction, the superior court misdemeanant probationer shall report to a
probation officer employed or contracted for by the county. In cases where a
superior court misdemeanant probationer is sentenced in one county, but resides
within another county, there must be provisions for the probationer to report
to the agency having supervision responsibility for the probationer's county of
residence.

(5) If the probationer
has been ordered to make restitution and the superior court has ordered
supervision, the officer supervising the probationer shall make a reasonable
effort to ascertain whether restitution has been made. If the superior court
has ordered supervision and restitution has not been made as ordered, the
officer shall inform the prosecutor of that violation of the terms of probation
not less than three months prior to the termination of the probation period.
The secretary of corrections will promulgate rules and regulations for the
conduct of the person during the term of probation. For defendants found
guilty in district court, like functions as the secretary performs in regard to
probation may be performed by probation officers employed for that purpose by
the county legislative authority of the county wherein the court is located.

(6) The department
may eliminate or terminate supervision, including supervision for payment of
restitution or legal financial obligations, if the department has classified
the probationer at the lowest risk level pursuant to a risk assessment. No
liability shall attach to the state, the department, or any department employee
based on the determination to classify a probationer at the lowest risk level,
or to eliminate or terminate supervision, in the absence of intentional
misconduct. The decision to eliminate or terminate supervision shall not
affect the superior court's jurisdiction over the probationer.

Sec. 17. RCW 72.04A.090 and 1981
c 136 s 84 are each amended to read as follows:

Whenever a parolee
breaches a condition or conditions under which he or she was granted
parole, or violates any law of the state or rules and regulations of the indeterminate
sentence review board ((of prison terms and paroles)), any ((probation
and parole)) community corrections officer may arrest, or cause the
arrest and suspension of parole of, such parolee without a warrant, pending a
determination by the board. The facts and circumstances of such conduct of the
parolee shall be reported by the ((probation and parole)) community
corrections officer, with recommendations, to the indeterminate sentence
review board ((of prison terms and paroles)), who may order the
revocation or suspension of parole, revise or modify the conditions of parole
or take such other action as may be deemed appropriate in accordance with RCW
9.95.120. The indeterminate sentence review board ((of prison terms
and paroles)), after consultation with the secretary of corrections, shall
make all rules and regulations concerning procedural matters, which shall
include the time when state ((probation and parole)) community
corrections officers shall file with the board reports required by this
section, procedures pertaining thereto and the filing of such information as
may be necessary to enable the indeterminate sentence review board ((of
prison terms and paroles)) to perform its functions under this section.

The ((probation and
parole)) community corrections officers shall have like authority
and power regarding the arrest and detention of a probationer who has breached
a condition or conditions under which he or she was granted probation by
the superior court, or violates any law of the state, pending a determination
by the superior court. Community corrections officers have no obligation to
arrest and detain a probationer, or to report a violation to the superior
court, where the department has eliminated or terminated supervision pursuant
to RCW 9.92.060, 9.95.204, or 9.95.210.

In the event a ((probation
and parole)) community corrections officer shall arrest or cause the
arrest and suspension of parole of a parolee or probationer in accordance with
the provisions of this section, such parolee or probationer shall be confined
and detained in the county jail of the county in which the parolee or
probationer was taken into custody, and the sheriff of such county shall
receive and keep in the county jail, where room is available, all prisoners
delivered thereto by the ((probation and parole)) community
corrections officer, and such parolees shall not be released from custody
on bail or personal recognizance, except upon approval of the indeterminate
sentence review board ((of prison terms and paroles)) and the
issuance by the board of an order of reinstatement on parole on the same or
modified conditions of parole.

Sec. 18. RCW 4.56.100 and 1997 c
358 s 4 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) When any judgment
for the payment of money only shall have been paid or satisfied, the clerk of
the court in which such judgment was rendered shall note upon the record in the
execution docket satisfaction thereof giving the date of such satisfaction upon
either the payment to such clerk of the amount of such judgment, costs and
interest and any accrued costs by reason of the issuance of any execution, or
the filing with such clerk of a satisfaction entitled in such action and
identifying the same executed by the judgment creditor or his or her attorney
of record in such action or his or her assignee acknowledged as deeds are
acknowledged. The clerk has the authority to note the satisfaction of
judgments for criminal and juvenile legal financial obligations when the
clerk's record indicates payment in full or as directed by the court. Every
satisfaction of judgment and every partial satisfaction of judgment which
provides for the payment of money shall clearly designate the judgment creditor
and his or her attorney if any, the judgment debtor, the amount or type of
satisfaction, whether the satisfaction is full or partial, the cause number,
and the date of entry of the judgment. A certificate by such clerk of the entry
of such satisfaction by him or her may be filed in the office of the clerk of
any county in which an abstract of such judgment has been filed. When so
satisfied by the clerk or the filing of such certificate the lien of such
judgment shall be discharged.

(2) The department of
social and health services shall file a satisfaction of judgment for welfare
fraud conviction if a person does not pay money through the clerk as required
under subsection (1) of this section.

(((3) The department
of corrections shall file a satisfaction of judgment if a person does not pay
money through the clerk's office as required under subsection (1) of this
section.))

Sec. 19. RCW 72.65.080 and 1982
1st ex.s. c 48 s 18 are each amended to read as follows:

The secretary may enter
into contracts with ((the appropriate authorities)) other
governmental agencies or private organizations for the ((payment of the
cost of feeding and lodging and other expenses of housing)) management
and operation of work release ((participants)) programs.
Such contracts may include any other terms and conditions as may be appropriate
for the implementation of the work release program. In addition the secretary
is authorized to acquire, by lease or contract, appropriate facilities for the
housing of work release participants and providing for their subsistence and
supervision. Such work release participants placed in leased or contracted
facilities shall be required to reimburse the department the per capita cost of
subsistence and lodging in accordance with the provisions and in the priority
established by RCW 72.65.050(2). The location of such facilities shall be
subject to the zoning laws of the city or county in which they may be situated.

Any work release
program in existence on the effective date of this act shall be managed and
operated pursuant to a contract with a private organization under this section.

Sec. 20. RCW 41.06.380 and 1979
ex.s. c 46 s 2 are each amended to read as follows:

Nothing contained in
this chapter shall prohibit any department, as defined in RCW 41.06.020, from
purchasing services by contract with individuals or business entities if such
services were regularly purchased by valid contract by such department prior to
April 23, 1979: PROVIDED, That no such contract may be executed or renewed if
it would have the effect of terminating classified employees or classified
employee positions existing at the time of the execution or renewal of the
contract, except as authorized by RCW 72.65.080.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 21. This act takes effect
July 1, 2002. The legislature intends that sections 1 through 18 of this act
apply retroactively to sentences imposed and offenders on community custody,
community placement, community supervision, or probation before, on, or after
July 1, 2002.

---
END ---