BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF
WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1. RCW 67.28.080 and 1997 c
452 s 2 are each amended to read as follows:

The definitions in this
section apply throughout this chapter unless the context clearly requires
otherwise.

(1)
"Acquisition" includes, but is not limited to, siting, acquisition, design,
construction, refurbishing, expansion, repair, and improvement, including
paying or securing the payment of all or any portion of general obligation
bonds, leases, revenue bonds, or other obligations issued or incurred for such
purpose or purposes under this chapter.

(2)
"Municipality" means any county, city or town of the state of
Washington.

(3)
"Operation" includes, but is not limited to, operation, management,
and marketing.

(4) "Person"
means the federal government or any agency thereof, the state or any agency,
subdivision, taxing district or municipal corporation thereof other than
county, city or town, any private corporation, partnership, association, or
individual.

(5) "Tourism"
means economic activity resulting from tourists, which may include sales of
overnight lodging, meals, tours, gifts, or souvenirs.

(6) "Tourism
promotion" means activities and expenditures designed to increase tourism,
including but not limited to advertising, publicizing, or otherwise
distributing information for the purpose of attracting and welcoming tourists;
developing strategies to expand tourism; operating tourism promotion agencies;
and funding marketing of special events and festivals designed to attract
tourists.

(7)
"Tourism-related facility" means real or tangible personal property
with a usable life of three or more years, or constructed with volunteer labor,
and used to support tourism, ((performing arts,)) or to accommodate
tourist activities which may include the performing arts.

(8) "Tourist"
means a person who travels from a place of residence to a different town, city,
county, state, or country, for purposes of an overnight stay related to
business, pleasure, recreation, education, arts, heritage, or culture.

Sec. 2. RCW 67.28.1817 and 1998
c 35 s 3 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) Before proposing
imposition of a new tax under this chapter, an increase in the rate of a tax
imposed under this chapter, repeal of an exemption from a tax imposed under
this chapter, or a change in the use of revenue received under this chapter, a
municipality with a population of five thousand or more shall establish a
lodging tax ((advisory)) committee under this section. A lodging tax ((advisory))
committee shall consist of at least five members, appointed by the legislative
body of the municipality, unless the municipality has a charter providing for a
different appointment authority. The committee membership shall ((include))
consist of the following: (a) At least two members who are
representatives of businesses required to collect tax under this chapter; ((and))
(b) at least two members who are persons involved in activities authorized to
be funded by revenue received under this chapter; and (c) one member who is
an elected official of the municipality who shall serve as chair. Persons
who are eligible for appointment under (a) of this subsection are not eligible
for appointment under (b) of this subsection. ((Persons who are eligible
for appointment under (b) of this subsection are not eligible for appointment
under (a) of this subsection.)) Organizations representing businesses
required to collect tax under this chapter, organizations involved in
activities authorized to be funded by revenue received under this chapter, and
local agencies involved in tourism promotion may submit recommendations for
membership on the committee. The number of members who are representatives of
businesses required to collect tax under this chapter shall equal the number of
members who are involved in activities authorized to be funded by revenue
received under this chapter. ((One member shall be an elected official of
the municipality who shall serve as chair of the committee. An advisory)) A
committee for a county may include one nonvoting member who is an elected
official of a city or town in the county. ((An advisory)) A
committee for a city or town may include one nonvoting member who is an elected
official of the county in which the city or town is located. The appointing
authority shall review the membership of the ((advisory)) committee
annually and make changes as appropriate.

(2) Any municipality
that proposes imposition of a tax under this chapter, an increase in the rate
of a tax imposed under this chapter, repeal of an exemption from a tax imposed
under this chapter, or a change in the use of revenue received under this
chapter shall submit the proposal to the lodging tax ((advisory))
committee for review and comment and approval or rejection. The
submission shall occur at least forty-five days before final action on or
passage of the proposal by the municipality. The ((advisory)) committee
shall ((submit comments on)) approve or reject the proposal in a
timely manner through generally applicable public comment procedures. The
comments shall include reasons for approval or rejection, including an
analysis of the extent to which the proposal will accommodate activities for
tourists or increase tourism, and the extent to which the proposal will affect
the long-term stability of the fund created under RCW 67.28.1815. ((Failure
of the advisory committee to submit comments before final action on or passage
of the proposal shall not prevent the municipality from acting on the
proposal. A municipality is not required to submit an amended proposal to an
advisory committee under this section.)) Multiyear expenditures from the
fund for a project or proposal shall be reviewed and approved or rejected
annually, except if an expenditure is to secure financing for a tourist-related
facility. No use of funds can be approved by the municipality until the
committee has approved its use.

(3) If a
municipality with a population of less than five thousand establishes a lodging
tax advisory committee, then the committee shall be composed according to
subsection (1) of this section and shall follow the procedures according to
subsection (2) of this section.

Sec. 3. RCW 67.28.1815 and 1997
c 452 s 4 are each amended to read as follows:

All
revenue from taxes imposed under this chapter shall be credited to a special
fund in the treasury of the municipality imposing such tax and used solely for
the purpose of paying all or any part of the cost of tourism promotion,
acquisition of tourism-related facilities, or operation of tourism-related
facilities. Municipalities may, under chapter 39.34 RCW, agree to the
utilization of revenue from taxes imposed under this chapter for the purposes
of funding a multijurisdictional tourism-related facility. Municipalities
must use or pledge at least seventy-five percent of the funds generated every
calendar year.

---
END ---