BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF
WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1. RCW 64.06.060 and 1994 c
200 s 7 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) The legislature
finds that the practices of any licensed real estate salesperson or broker that
are covered by this chapter are matters vitally affecting the public interest
for the purpose of applying the consumer protection act, chapter 19.86 RCW. A
violation of this chapter by any licensed real estate salesperson or broker is
not reasonable in relation to the development and preservation of business and
is an unfair or deceptive act in trade or commerce and an unfair method of
competition for the purpose of applying the consumer protection act, chapter
19.86 RCW.

(2) Except as
provided in subsection (1) of this section, the legislature finds that the
practices of any seller of residential real property that are covered by
this chapter are not matters vitally affecting the public interest for the
purpose of applying the consumer protection act, chapter 19.86 RCW.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 2. This act takes effect
July 1, 2002.

---
END ---