BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF
WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1. RCW 67.40.120 and 1997 c
452 s 20 are each amended to read as follows:

The state
convention and trade center corporation may contract with the Seattle-King
county convention and visitors bureau for marketing the convention and trade
center facility and services. ((Any contract with the Seattle-King county
convention and visitors bureau shall include, but is not limited to, the
following condition: Each dollar in convention and trade center operations
account funds provided to the Seattle-King county convention and visitors
bureau shall be matched by at least one dollar and ten cents in nonstate
funds. "Nonstate funds" does not include funds received under
chapter 67.28 RCW.))

--- END ---