BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF
WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1. RCW 34.05.320 and 1995 c
403 s 302 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) At least twenty
days before the rule-making hearing at which the agency receives public comment
regarding adoption of a rule, the agency shall cause notice of the hearing to
be published in the state register. The publication constitutes the proposal
of a rule. The notice shall include all of the following:

(a) A title, a
description of the rule's purpose, and any other information which may be of
assistance in identifying the rule or its purpose;

(b) Citations of the
statutory authority for adopting the rule and the specific statute the rule is
intended to implement;

(c) A summary of the
rule and a statement of the reasons supporting the proposed action;

(d) The agency
personnel, with their office location and telephone number, who are responsible
for the drafting, implementation, and enforcement of the rule;

(e) The name of the
person or organization, whether private, public, or governmental, proposing the
rule;

(f) Agency comments or
recommendations, if any, regarding statutory language, implementation,
enforcement, and fiscal matters pertaining to the rule;

(g) Whether the rule is
necessary as the result of federal law or federal or state court action, and if
so, a copy of such law or court decision shall be attached to the purpose
statement;

(h) When, where, and
how persons may present their views on the proposed rule;

(i) The date on which
the agency intends to adopt the rule;

(j) A short explanation
of the rule, its purpose, and anticipated effects, including in the case of a
proposal that would modify existing rules, a short description of the changes
the proposal would make;

(k) A copy of the small
business economic impact statement prepared under chapter 19.85 RCW, or an
explanation for why the agency did not prepare the statement; and

(l) A statement
indicating whether RCW 34.05.328 applies to the rule adoption, and if that
section is applicable, a statement that describes the methodology to be used to
determine the probable benefits and probable costs of the rule, or that a
preliminary analysis of the probable benefits and probable costs of the rule is
available upon request.

(2) Upon filing notice
of the proposed rule with the code reviser, the adopting agency shall have
copies of the notice on file and available for public inspection and shall
forward three copies of the notice to the rules review committee.

(3) No later than three
days after its publication in the state register, the agency shall cause a copy
of the notice of proposed rule adoption to be mailed to each person, city, and
county that has made a request to the agency for a mailed copy of such
notices. An agency may charge for the actual cost of providing a requesting
party mailed copies of these notices.

(4) In
addition to the notice required by subsections (1) and (2) of this section, an
institution of higher education shall cause the notice to be published in the
campus or standard newspaper of the institution at least seven days before the
rule-making hearing.

--- END ---