BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF
WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec.
1. (1) The state board of
education finds that research supports advantages to student learning from the
use of calendars balanced for learning, instruction, and retention, such as:

(a) Reduction of summer
learning loss;

(b) Opportunities for
increased learning time, which helps all students;

(c) Opportunities for
intervention throughout the academic year, which helps prevent learning
problems and learning failure;

(d) Better attendance
by students and teachers;

(e) Decreased student
discipline referrals;

(f) Decreased student
vandalism;

(g) Lower dropout rate;
and

(h) Continuous learning
and preparation for state-mandated testing.

(2) The board further
finds that calendars balanced for achievement, separated by vacation and
intersession enrichment and remediation periods, can provide benefits for
school staff planning and professional development, facility use, and increased
vacation flexibility for families and staff not otherwise available from the
traditional school calendar.

(3)(a) The
superintendent of public instruction, in consultation with the state board of
education, shall award planning grants to schools or school districts seeking
to develop and implement a balanced student achievement calendar. For the purpose
of this section, a "balanced student achievement calendar" means a
school year of one hundred eighty days that are distributed over a twelve-month
period, during which time the school year calendar schedules regular student
instructional days of one week or more in eleven of the twelve months, and
summer break is six weeks, thereby allowing for intersession instructional
periods.

(b) The intent of the
grant program is to facilitate the development and implementation of balanced
student achievement calendars that provide more continuous periods of learning
and instruction as relates to student promotion, enrichment, acceleration, and
remediation, and opportunities for extended time or days for additional
learning opportunities for all students to meet their individual learning
needs.

(4) The superintendent
of public instruction and the state board of education shall submit a joint
report to the education committees of the legislature not later than January
30, 2004, on the number of grants awarded and the types of balanced student
achievement calendars implemented.

(5) This section
expires June 30, 2004.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
2. (1) The sum of one
hundred twenty-five thousand dollars, or as much thereof as may be necessary,
is appropriated for the fiscal year ending June 30, 2003, from the general fund
to the superintendent of public instruction for the purposes of this act.

(2) Not more than
twenty-five thousand dollars of the appropriation in this section may be used
by the superintendent of public instruction for administrative purposes.

(3) Not
more than twenty-five thousand dollars of the appropriation in this section may
be used for a pregrant application forum to expand public awareness of balanced
student achievement calendars and provide potential grant applicants with
information to assist in submitting focused and thoughtful applications.

---
END ---