BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF
WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec.
1. A new section is added
to chapter 82.04 RCW to read as follows:

This chapter does not
apply to amounts received by health care providers licensed under chapter
18.57, 18.71, 18.71A, or 18.57A RCW from the United States or any
instrumentality of the United States, or from the state of Washington or any
municipal corporation or political subdivision of the state of Washington, to
the same extent provided for health or social welfare organizations under RCW
82.04.4297.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 2. This act takes effect
July 1, 2002.

---
END ---