BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF
WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1. RCW 84.36.020 and 1994 c
124 s 16 are each amended to read as follows:

The following real and
personal property shall be exempt from taxation:

(1) All lands,
buildings, and personal property required for necessary administration and
maintenance, used, or to the extent used, exclusively for public burying
grounds or cemeteries without discrimination as to race, color, national origin
or ancestry;

(2) All
churches, personal property, and the ground, not exceeding five acres in area,
upon which a church of any nonprofit recognized religious denomination is or
shall be built, together with a parsonage, convent, and buildings and
improvements required for the maintenance and safeguarding of such property. To
be exempt, the property must be exclusively used for church purposes.

(a) The area
exempted shall ((in any case)) include all ground covered by the church,
parsonage, convent, and buildings and improvements required for the maintenance
and safeguarding of ((such)) the property and the structures and
ground necessary for street access, parking, light, and ventilation((, but)).

(b) The area of
unoccupied ground exempted ((in such cases,)) in connection with church,
parsonage, convent, and buildings and improvements required for the maintenance
and safeguarding of ((such)) property, shall not exceed the equivalent
of one hundred twenty by one hundred twenty feet except where additional
unoccupied land may be required to conform with state or local codes, zoning,
or licensing requirements.

(c) The
parsonage and convent need not be on land contiguous to the church property.
((To be exempt the property must be wholly used for church purposes:
PROVIDED, That))

(d) A residence
located on this property shall also be exempt if it is used:

(i) As housing for
visiting clergy, missionaries, or speakers for the congregation if the stay of
each visitor is limited to ten consecutive days or less; or

(ii) To provide
emergency shelter to persons in need if the emergency stay of each person is
limited to sixty consecutive days or less and the donations, if any, received
by the church for providing the emergency shelter do not exceed the costs to
maintain and operate the shelter.

(e) The loan or
rental of property otherwise exempt under this paragraph to a nonprofit organization,
association, or corporation, or school for use for an eleemosynary activity
shall not nullify the exemption provided in this paragraph if the rental
income, if any, is reasonable and is devoted solely to the operation and
maintenance of the property.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 2. This act applies to taxes
levied for collection in 2003 and thereafter.

---
END ---