BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF
WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1. RCW 82.14.200 and 1998 c
321 s 8 are each amended to read as follows:

There is created in the
state treasury a special account to be known as the "county sales and use
tax equalization account." ((Into this account shall be placed a
portion of all motor vehicle excise tax receipts as provided in RCW 82.44.110.))
On July 1, 2002, the treasurer shall transfer three million dollars from the
state general fund to the account. On July 1st of each fiscal year thereafter,
the treasurer shall transfer the amount transferred in the previous fiscal
year, increased by the current fiscal growth factor as calculated by the office
of financial management. Funds in this account shall be allocated by the
state treasurer according to the following procedure:

(1) Prior to April 1st
of each year the director of revenue shall inform the state treasurer of the
total and the per capita levels of revenues for the unincorporated area of each
county and the statewide weighted average per capita level of revenues for the
unincorporated areas of all counties imposing the sales and use tax authorized under
RCW 82.14.030(1) for the previous calendar year.

(2) ((At such times
as distributions are made under RCW 82.44.150)) On July 1st of each
fiscal year, the state treasurer shall apportion to each county imposing
the sales and use tax under RCW 82.14.030(1) at the maximum rate and receiving
less than one hundred fifty thousand dollars from the tax for the previous
calendar year, an amount from the county sales and use tax equalization account
sufficient, when added to the amount of revenues received the previous calendar
year by the county, to equal one hundred fifty thousand dollars.

The department of
revenue shall establish a governmental price index as provided in this
subsection. The base year for the index shall be the end of the third quarter
of 1982. Prior to November 1, 1983, and prior to each November 1st thereafter,
the department of revenue shall establish another index figure for the third
quarter of that year. The department of revenue may use the implicit price
deflators for state and local government purchases of goods and services
calculated by the United States department of commerce to establish the
governmental price index. Beginning on January 1, 1984, and each January 1st
thereafter, the one hundred fifty thousand dollar base figure in this
subsection shall be adjusted in direct proportion to the percentage change in
the governmental price index from 1982 until the year before the adjustment.
Distributions made under this subsection for 1984 and thereafter shall use this
adjusted base amount figure.

(3) Subsequent to the
distributions under subsection (2) of this section and ((at such times as
distributions are made under RCW 82.44.150)) on July 1st of each fiscal
year, the state treasurer shall apportion to each county imposing the sales
and use tax under RCW 82.14.030(1) at the maximum rate and receiving less than
((seventy)) fifty percent of the statewide weighted average per
capita level of revenues for the unincorporated areas of all counties as
determined by the department of revenue under subsection (1) of this section,
an amount from the county sales and use tax equalization account sufficient,
when added to the per capita level of revenues for the unincorporated area
received the previous calendar year by the county, to equal ((seventy)) fifty
percent of the statewide weighted average per capita level of revenues for the
unincorporated areas of all counties determined under subsection (1) of this
section, subject to reduction under subsections (6) and (7) of this section. When
computing distributions under this section, any distribution under subsection
(2) of this section shall be considered revenues received from the tax imposed
under RCW 82.14.030(1) for the previous calendar year.

(4) Subsequent to the
distributions under subsection (3) of this section and ((at such times as
distributions are made under RCW 82.44.150)) on July 1st of each fiscal
year, the state treasurer shall apportion to each county imposing the sales
and use tax under RCW 82.14.030(2) at the maximum rate and receiving a
distribution under subsection (2) of this section, a third distribution from
the county sales and use tax equalization account. The distribution to each
qualifying county shall be equal to the distribution to the county under
subsection (2) of this section, subject to the reduction under subsections (6)
and (7) of this section. To qualify for the total distribution under this
subsection, the county must impose the tax under RCW 82.14.030(2) for the
entire calendar year. Counties imposing the tax for less than the full year
shall qualify for prorated allocations under this subsection proportionate to
the number of months of the year during which the tax is imposed.

(5) Subsequent to the
distributions under subsection (4) of this section and ((at such times as
distributions are made under RCW 82.44.150)) on July 1st of each fiscal
year, the state treasurer shall apportion to each county imposing the sales
and use tax under RCW 82.14.030(2) at the maximum rate and receiving a
distribution under subsection (3) of this section, a fourth distribution from
the county sales and use tax equalization account. The distribution to each
qualifying county shall be equal to the distribution to the county under
subsection (3) of this section, subject to the reduction under subsections (6)
and (7) of this section. To qualify for the distributions under this
subsection, the county must impose the tax under RCW 82.14.030(2) for the
entire calendar year. Counties imposing the tax for less than the full year
shall qualify for prorated allocations under this subsection proportionate to
the number of months of the year during which the tax is imposed.

(6) Revenues
distributed under subsections (2) through (5) of this section in any calendar
year shall not exceed an amount equal to seventy percent of the statewide
weighted average per capita level of revenues for the unincorporated areas of
all counties during the previous calendar year. If distributions under
subsections (3) through (5) of this section cannot be made because of this
limitation, then distributions under subsections (3) through (5) of this
section shall be reduced ratably among the qualifying counties.

(7) If inadequate
revenues exist in the county sales and use tax equalization account to make the
distributions under subsections (3) through (5) of this section, then the
distributions under subsections (3) through (5) of this section shall be
reduced ratably among the qualifying counties. At such time during the year as
additional funds accrue to the county sales and use tax equalization account,
additional distributions shall be made under subsections (3) through (5) of
this section to the counties.

(8) If the level of
revenues in the county sales and use tax equalization account exceeds the
amount necessary to make the distributions under subsections (2) through (5) of
this section, ((at such times as distributions are made under RCW 82.44.150))
on July 1st of each fiscal year, the state treasurer shall apportion an
amount to the county public health account created in RCW 70.05.125 equal to
the adjustment under RCW 70.05.125(2)(b).

(9) If the level of
revenues in the county sales and use tax equalization account exceeds the
amount necessary to make the distributions under subsections (2) through (5)
and (8) of this section, then the additional revenues shall be credited and
transferred as follows:

(a) Fifty percent to
the public facilities construction loan revolving account under RCW 43.160.080;
and

(b) Fifty percent to
the distressed county public facilities construction loan account under RCW
43.160.220, or so much thereof as will not cause the balance in the account to
exceed twenty-five million dollars. Any remaining funds shall be deposited
into the public facilities construction loan revolving account.

Sec. 2. RCW 82.14.210 and 1996 c
64 s 1 are each amended to read as follows:

There is created in the
state treasury a special account to be known as the "municipal sales and
use tax equalization account." ((Into this account shall be placed
such revenues as are provided under RCW 82.44.110(1)(e).)) On July 1,
2002, the treasurer shall transfer fifteen million dollars from the state
general fund to the account. On July 1st of each fiscal year thereafter, the
treasurer shall transfer the amount transferred in the previous fiscal year,
increased by the current fiscal growth factor as calculated by the office of
financial management. Funds in this account shall be allocated by the
state treasurer according to the following procedure:

(1) Prior to January
1st of each year the department of revenue shall determine the total and the
per capita levels of revenues for each city and the statewide weighted average
per capita level of revenues for all cities imposing the sales and use tax
authorized under RCW 82.14.030(1) for the previous calendar year.

(2) ((At such times
as distributions are made under RCW 82.44.150, the state treasurer shall
apportion to each city not imposing the sales and use tax under RCW 82.14.030(2)
an amount from the municipal sales and use tax equalization account equal to
the amount distributed to the city under RCW 82.44.155, multiplied by forty‑five
fifty‑fifths.)) By May 31st of each year, the department of
revenue shall calculate the amounts that would be apportioned and distributed
to cities and towns ratably on the basis of population as last determined by
the office of financial management. The basis for the calculation shall be the
total amount transferred to the account created in subsection (1) of this
section during the current fiscal year. On July 1st of each fiscal year after
fiscal year 2002, the state treasurer shall distribute to each city not
imposing the sales and use tax under RCW 82.14.030(2) the amount calculated for
the city by the department of revenue in the preceding fiscal year.

(3) Subsequent to the
distributions under subsection (2) of this section, ((and at such times as
distributions are made under RCW 82.44.150)) on July 1st of each fiscal
year, the state treasurer shall apportion to each city imposing the sales
and use tax under RCW 82.14.030(1) at the maximum rate and receiving less than
((seventy)) fifty percent of the statewide weighted average per
capita level of revenues for all cities as determined by the department of
revenue under subsection (1) of this section, an amount from the municipal
sales and use tax equalization account sufficient, when added to the per capita
level of revenues received the previous calendar year by the city, to equal ((seventy))
fifty percent of the statewide weighted average per capita level of
revenues for all cities determined under subsection (1) of this section,
subject to reduction under subsection (6) of this section.

(4) Subsequent to the
distributions under subsection (3) of this section, ((and at such times as
distributions are made under RCW 82.44.150)) on July 1st of each fiscal
year, the state treasurer shall apportion to each city imposing the sales
and use tax under RCW 82.14.030(2) at the maximum rate and receiving a
distribution under subsection (3) of this section, a third distribution from
the municipal sales and use tax equalization account. The distribution to each
qualifying city shall be equal to the distribution to the city under subsection
(3) of this section, subject to the reduction under subsection (6) of this
section. To qualify for the distributions under this subsection, the city must
impose the tax under RCW 82.14.030(2) for the entire calendar year. Cities
imposing the tax for less than the full year shall qualify for prorated
allocations under this subsection proportionate to the number of months of the
year during which the tax is imposed.

(5) For a city with an
official incorporation date after January 1, 1990, municipal sales and use tax
equalization distributions shall be made according to the procedures in this
subsection. Municipal sales and use tax equalization distributions to eligible
new cities shall be made at the same time as distributions are made under
subsections (3) and (4) of this section. The department of revenue shall
follow the estimating procedures outlined in this subsection until the new city
has received a full year's worth of revenues under RCW 82.14.030(1) ((as of
the January municipal sales and use tax equalization distribution)).

(a) ((Whether a
newly incorporated city determined to receive funds under this subsection
receives its first equalization payment at the January, April, July, or October
municipal sales and use tax equalization distribution shall depend on the date
the city first imposes the tax authorized under RCW 82.14.030(1).

(i) A newly
incorporated city imposing the tax authorized under RCW 82.14.030(1) effective
as of January 1st shall be eligible to receive funds under this subsection
beginning with the April municipal sales and use tax equalization distribution
of that year.

(ii) A newly
incorporated city imposing the tax authorized under RCW 82.14.030(1) effective
as of February 1st, March 1st, or April 1st shall be eligible to receive funds
under this subsection beginning with the July municipal sales and use tax
equalization distribution of that year.

(iii) A newly
incorporated city imposing the tax authorized under RCW 82.14.030(1) effective
as of May 1st, June 1st, or July 1st shall be eligible to receive funds under
this subsection beginning with the October municipal sales and use tax
equalization distribution of that year.

(iv) A newly
incorporated city imposing the tax authorized under RCW 82.14.030(1) effective
as of August 1st, September 1st, or October 1st shall be eligible to receive
funds under this subsection beginning with the January municipal sales and use
tax equalization distribution of the next year.

(v) A newly
incorporated city imposing the tax authorized under RCW 82.14.030(1) effective
as of November 1st or December 1st shall be eligible to receive funds under
this subsection beginning with the April municipal sales and use tax
equalization distribution of the next year.

(b))) For purposes of calculating the amount of
funds the new city should receive under this subsection, the department of
revenue shall:

(i) Estimate the per
capita amount of revenues from the tax authorized under RCW 82.14.030(1) that
the new city would have received had the city received revenues from the tax
the entire calendar year;

(ii) Calculate the
amount provided under subsection (3) of this section based on the per capita
revenues determined under (((b))) (a)(i) of this subsection;

(iii) Prorate the
amount determined under (((b))) (a)(ii) of this subsection by the
number of months the tax authorized under RCW 82.14.030(1) is imposed.

(((c))) (b)
A new city imposing the tax under RCW 82.14.030(2) at the maximum rate and
receiving a distribution calculated under (((b))) (a) of this
subsection shall receive another distribution from the municipal sales and use
tax equalization account. This distribution shall be equal to the calculation
made under (((b))) (a)(ii) of this subsection, prorated by the
number of months the city imposes the tax authorized under RCW 82.14.030(2) at
the full rate.

(((d))) (c)
The department of revenue shall advise the state treasurer of the amounts
calculated under (b) ((and (c))) of this subsection and the state
treasurer shall distribute these amounts to the new city from the municipal
sales and use tax equalization account subject to the limitations imposed in
subsection (6) of this section.

(((e))) (d)
Revenues estimated under this subsection shall not affect the calculation of
the statewide weighted average per capita level of revenues for all cities made
under subsection (1) of this section.

(6) If inadequate
revenues exist in the municipal sales and use tax equalization account to make
the distributions under subsection (3), (4), or (5) of this section, then the distributions
under subsections (3), (4), and (5) of this section shall be reduced ratably
among the qualifying cities. At such time during the year as additional funds
accrue to the municipal sales and use tax equalization account, additional
distributions shall be made under subsections (3), (4), and (5) of this section
to the cities.

(7) If the
level of revenues in the municipal sales and use tax equalization account
exceeds the amount necessary to make the distributions under subsections (2)
through (5) of this section, then the additional revenues shall be apportioned
among the several cities within the state ratably on the basis of population as
last determined by the office of financial management: PROVIDED, That no such
distribution shall be made to those cities receiving a distribution under
subsection (2) of this section.

---
END ---