BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF
WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1. RCW 58.17.110 and 1995 c
32 s 3 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) The city, town, or
county legislative body shall inquire into the public use and interest proposed
to be served by the establishment of the subdivision and dedication. It shall
determine: (a) If appropriate provisions are made for, but not limited to, the
public health, safety, and general welfare, for open spaces, drainage ways,
streets or roads, alleys, other public ways, transit stops, potable water
supplies, sanitary wastes, parks and recreation, playgrounds, schools and
schoolgrounds, and shall consider all other relevant facts, including sidewalks
and other planning features that assure safe walking conditions for students
who ((only)) walk to and from school; and (b) whether the public
interest will be served by the subdivision and dedication.

(2) A proposed
subdivision and dedication shall not be approved unless the city, town, or
county legislative body makes written findings that: (a) Appropriate
provisions are made for the public health, safety, and general welfare and for
such open spaces, drainage ways, streets or roads, alleys, other public ways,
transit stops, potable water supplies, sanitary wastes, parks and recreation,
playgrounds, schools and schoolgrounds and all other relevant facts, including
sidewalks and other planning features that assure safe walking conditions for
students who only walk to and from school; and (b) the public use and interest
will be served by the platting of such subdivision and dedication. If it finds
that the proposed subdivision and dedication make such appropriate provisions
and that the public use and interest will be served, then the legislative body
shall approve the proposed subdivision and dedication. Dedication of land to
any public body, provision of public improvements to serve the subdivision, and/or
impact fees imposed under RCW 82.02.050 through 82.02.090 may be required as a
condition of subdivision approval. Dedications shall be clearly shown on the
final plat. No dedication, provision of public improvements, or impact fees
imposed under RCW 82.02.050 through 82.02.090 shall be allowed that constitutes
an unconstitutional taking of private property. The legislative body shall not
as a condition to the approval of any subdivision require a release from
damages to be procured from other property owners.

(3) If the
preliminary plat includes a dedication of a public park with an area of less
than two acres and the donor has designated that the park be named in honor of
a deceased individual of good character, the city, town, or county legislative
body must adopt the designated name.

--- END ---