BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF
WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1. RCW 9.95.240 and 1957 c
227 s 7 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) Every
defendant who has fulfilled the conditions of his or her probation for
the entire period thereof, or who shall have been discharged from probation
prior to the termination of the period thereof, may at any time ((prior to
the expiration of the maximum period of punishment for the offense for which he
has been convicted)) be permitted in the discretion of the court to withdraw
his or her plea of guilty and enter a plea of not guilty, or if he or
she has been convicted after a plea of not guilty, the court may in its
discretion set aside the verdict of guilty; and in either case, the court may
thereupon dismiss the information or indictment against such defendant, who
shall thereafter be released from all penalties and disabilities resulting from
the offense or crime of which he or she has been convicted. ((The
probationer shall be informed of this right in his probation papers: PROVIDED,
That in any subsequent prosecution, for any other offense, such prior
conviction may be pleaded and proved, and shall have the same effect as if
probation had not been granted, or the information or indictment dismissed.))
The order of dismissal shall have the effect of restoring all civil rights
lost by operation of law upon conviction, and the order of dismissal shall so
state.

(2)(a) The court may
also, in its discretion, enter an order vacating the judgment and sentence as
provided in RCW 9.94A.640. Once a court vacates a record of conviction under
this section, the fact that the offender has been convicted of the offense
shall not be included in the offender's criminal history for purposes of
determining a sentence in any subsequent conviction. For all purposes,
including responding to questions on employment applications, an offender whose
conviction has been vacated under this section may state that the offender has
never been convicted of that crime.

(b) The clerk of the
court in which the vacation order is entered shall immediately transmit the
order vacating the conviction to the Washington state patrol identification
section and to the local police agency, if any, which holds criminal history
information for the person who is the subject of the conviction. The
Washington state patrol and any such local police agency shall immediately
update their records to reflect the vacation of the conviction, and shall
transmit the order vacating the conviction to the federal bureau of investigation.
A conviction that has been vacated under this section may not be disseminated
or disclosed by the state patrol or local law enforcement agency to any person,
except other criminal justice enforcement agencies.

Sec. 2. RCW 9.92.066 and 1971
ex.s. c 188 s 3 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) Upon
termination of any suspended sentence under RCW 9.92.060 or 9.95.210, such
person may apply to the court for restoration of his or her civil rights,
and an order vacating the judgment and sentence as provided in RCW 9.94A.640.
Once a court vacates a record of conviction under this section, the fact that
the offender has been convicted of the offense shall not be included in the
offender's criminal history for purposes of determining a sentence in any
subsequent conviction. For all purposes, including responding to questions on
employment applications, an offender whose conviction has been vacated under
this section may state that the offender has never been convicted of that crime.
Thereupon the court may in its discretion enter an order directing that,
when such an order vacating the judgment and sentence is entered, such
defendant shall thereafter be released from all penalties and disabilities
resulting from the offense or crime of which he or she has been
convicted.

(2) The
clerk of the court in which the vacation order is entered shall immediately
transmit the order vacating the conviction to the Washington state patrol identification
section and to the local police agency, if any, which holds criminal history
information for the person who is the subject of the conviction. The
Washington state patrol and any such local police agency shall immediately
update their records to reflect the vacation of the conviction, and shall
transmit the order vacating the conviction to the federal bureau of
investigation. A conviction that has been vacated under this section may not
be disseminated or disclosed by the state patrol or local law enforcement
agency to any person, except other criminal justice enforcement agencies.

---
END ---