BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF
WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1. RCW 43.136.010 and 1982
1st ex.s. c 35 s 39 are each amended to read as follows:

The legislature
recognizes that tax preferences are enacted by the legislature to meet
objectives which are determined to be in the public interest. The legislature
finds, however, that some tax preferences may not be efficient or equitable
tools for the achievement of current legislative objectives. The legislature
finds that unless it can be demonstrated that the public interest is served by
the continued existence of tax preferences, they should be terminated or
modified. The legislature further finds that periodic evaluations of tax
preferences are needed to determine if their continued existence is in the
public interest.

It is the intent of the
legislature to establish a mechanism for scheduling periodic evaluations of tax
preferences together with a system for their termination, continuation, or
modification. By this mechanism, the legislature intends to ensure that
thorough ((periodic)) evaluations are made for each exemption at
least once every six years and that those tax preferences which do not
continue to serve the public interest are terminated or modified.

Sec. 2. RCW 43.136.030 and 1982
1st ex.s. c 35 s 41 are each amended to read as follows:

The joint
legislative ((budget)) audit and review committee shall establish
a schedule for review of each tax preference ((for termination))
at least once every six years by the processes provided in this
chapter. The review shall be completed and a report prepared on or before ((June))
September 30th of the year ((prior to the date established for
termination)) of review. Upon completion of its report, the ((legislative
budget)) committee shall transmit copies of the report to the department of
revenue. The department of revenue may then conduct its own review of the tax
preference ((scheduled for termination)) and shall prepare a report on
or before ((September 30th)) December 31st of the year prior to
the date established for termination. Upon completion of its report the
department of revenue shall transmit copies of its report to the joint
legislative ((budget)) audit and review committee. The ((legislative
budget)) committee shall prepare a final report that includes the reports
of both the department of revenue and the ((legislative budget))
committee. The ((legislative budget)) committee and the department of
revenue shall, upon request, make available to each other all working papers,
studies, and other documents which relate to reports required under this
section. The ((legislative budget)) committee shall transmit the final
report to ((all members of the legislature)) the finance committee of
the house of representatives, to the ways and means committee of the senate,
to the governor, and to the state library.

Sec. 3. RCW 43.136.040 and 1982
1st ex.s. c 35 s 42 are each amended to read as follows:

In reviewing a tax
preference, the joint legislative ((budget)) audit and review
committee shall develop information needed by the legislature to determine if
the tax preference should be terminated as scheduled, modified, or ((reestablished))
continued without modification. The ((legislative budget))
committee shall consider, but not be limited to, the following factors in the
review.

(1) The persons or
organizations whose state tax liabilities are directly affected by the tax
preference.

(2) Legislative
objectives that might provide a justification for the tax preference,
including the extent to which the preference encourages business growth or
relocation into this state.

(3) Evidence that the
existence of the tax preference has contributed to the achievement of any of
the objectives identified in subsection (2) of this section.

(4) The extent to which
continuation of the tax preference ((beyond its scheduled termination date))
might contribute to any of the objectives identified in subsection (2) of this
section.

(5) Fiscal impacts of
the tax preference, including past impacts and expected future impacts if it is
((not terminated as scheduled)) continued.

(6) The extent to which
termination of the tax preference would affect the distribution of liability
for payment of state taxes.

Sec. 4. RCW 43.136.050 and 1982
1st ex.s. c 35 s 43 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) Following receipt
of the final report from the joint legislative ((budget)) audit
and review committee, the ((ways and means committees)) finance
committee of the house of representatives and the ways and means
committee of the senate shall jointly hold a public hearing to consider the
final report and any related data. The committees shall also receive testimony
from the governor, or the governor's designee, and other interested parties,
including the general public.

(2) Following the joint
hearing, the committees may separately hold additional meetings or hearings to
come to a final determination as to whether a continuation, modification, or
termination of a tax preference is in the public interest. If a committee
determines that a tax preference should be ((continued or modified)) terminated,
it shall make the determination as a bill. ((No more than one tax
preference shall be reestablished or modified in any one bill.))

Sec. 5. RCW 43.136.070 and 1982
1st ex.s. c 35 s 45 are each amended to read as follows:

((On or
before September 30, 1982,)) The department of revenue shall provide
the ((select)) joint legislative audit and review committee with
((a)) reports on existing tax preferences prepared under RCW
43.06.400. ((The report shall include a list of tax preferences and a
description of each one.)) Upon request of the ((select joint))
committee, the department of revenue shall provide additional information
needed by the ((select joint)) committee to meet its responsibilities
under this chapter.

---
END ---