BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF
WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec.
1. (1)(a) The legislature
finds that the common schools of Washington began to implement comprehensive
performance‑based education reforms in 1993 as provided in House Bill No.
1209 and subsequent legislation. The principal features of the present system
for funding the operation of the common schools were enacted in 1977. The more
fully schools and school districts implement performance-based educational
programs, the less well‑aligned Washington's school funding and school
program delivery systems become. The governor's council on education reform
and funding, created by executive order in 1991, did not adopt recommendations
to redesign the education funding system to align it with the performance-based
instructional program model the commission recommended.

(b) The legislature
also finds that many schools and school districts in Washington have developed
creative approaches to helping students achieve the essential academic learning
requirements and the goals of the basic education act as codified in RCW
28A.150.210. The successes already achieved by schools and school districts on
the Washington assessment of student learning constitute evidence that the
experiences of schools and school districts in Washington may suggest viable
strategies for designing performance-based funding programs.

(c) The legislature
further finds that the 2001 amendments to the federal elementary and secondary
education act of 1965 will result in a fundamental change in programs for
low-achieving and disadvantaged students, new requirements for new teachers and
paraprofessionals, increasingly intensive accountability measures for low‑performing
schools, and a shift in the way federal and state funds are used to support
student learning.

(d) The legislature
recognizes that as statewide accountability systems are developed and
implemented to hold students, schools, and school districts accountable for
improving student performance, and as the new federal requirements are
implemented, it is appropriate and necessary to concurrently conduct a
fundamental reexamination of the educational funding system and to explore
optional ways to distribute state funds to meet the educational needs of
students.

(2) As used in this
section, "task force" means the task force on school funding review.

(3) The task force on
school funding review is created.

(4)(a) The task force
shall consist of thirteen members as follows: Seven citizen members, appointed
by the governor, each of whom shall apply for membership and demonstrate his or
her concern and interest in education financing; two members of the house of
representatives, one from each major caucus, appointed by the speaker of the house
of representatives; two members of the senate, one from each major caucus,
appointed by the president of the senate; the superintendent of public
instruction or the superintendent's designee; and a representative of the
office of the governor or the office of financial management. When appointing
the citizen members of the task force, the governor shall consider the
applicants' expertise in educational finance, and shall attempt to include
persons who bring expertise in one or more of the following areas: As parents,
business and community leaders, individuals with experience as principals,
superintendents, school business managers, school auditors, teachers, and
school directors, persons with experience working in postsecondary education,
and persons with expertise in special education, career and technical
education, and programs designed to meet the need of students with limited
English proficiency.

(b) The governor shall
appoint the chair of the task force.

(5) The task force,
with the assistance of any advisory committee it appoints, shall:

(a) Identify
successful comprehensive school or school district program models from within
the state and from schools and school districts in other states. In the
identification process, the task force shall place special emphasis on results
on the Washington assessment of student learning, the national assessment of
educational progress, and standards-based assessments used in other states;

(b) Review the existing
education funding formulas with the goal of simplifying the formulas, removing
any financial system barriers to student achievement, achieving equity of
educational opportunity, and creating a performance-driven funding system that
will focus on the state's need to bring all children up to the state's academic
standards. In its review, the task force shall include but need not be limited
to: Funding formulas for local effort assistance; the learning improvement
program; special education; the small schools factor; nonhigh districts; and
running start;

(c) Review
performance-based and other innovative education funding models used in other
states; and

(d) Develop options for
a performance-based funding structure for education. The options shall include
but need not be limited to:

(i) An option that
assumes a funding structure roughly within existing budget levels for
education; and

(ii) One or more
options that describe what could be accomplished with different increments of
additional education funding.

(6) The task force
shall report its findings and recommendations to the governor and the
legislative fiscal and education committees by October 1, 2004.

(7) The office of
financial management shall provide staff support to the task force, and may
enter into contracts for any services necessary to fulfill the duties of the
task force under this section. The office of the superintendent of public
instruction shall cooperate with the task force and share, in a timely fashion,
all available data and information requested by the task force.

(8) This
section expires June 30, 2005.

---
END ---