BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1. RCW 28A.655.130 and 1999
c 388 s 402 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) To the extent funds
are appropriated, the office of the superintendent of public instruction
annually shall allocate accountability implementation funds to school
districts. The purposes of the funds are to: Develop and update student
learning improvement plans; implement curriculum materials and instructional
strategies; provide staff professional development to implement the selected
curricula and instruction; develop and implement assessment strategies and
training in assessment scoring; and fund other activities intended to improve
student learning for all students, including students with diverse needs.
Activities funded by the allocations must be consistent with the school or
district improvement plan, designed to improve the ability of teachers and
other instructional certificated and classified staff to assist students in
meeting the essential academic learning requirements, and designed to achieve
state and local accountability goals. Activities funded by the allocations
shall be designed to protect the teachers' instructional time with students and
minimize the use of substitute teachers.

(2) Schools receiving
funds shall develop, update as needed, and keep on file a school student
learning improvement plan to achieve the student learning goals and essential
academic learning requirements and to implement the assessment system as it is
developed. The plan shall delineate how the accountability implementation
funds will be used to accomplish the requirements of this section. The plan
shall be made available to the public and to others upon request.

(3) The
superintendent of public instruction may allocate to school districts funds
provided under RCW 70.105D.070(5) for curriculum materials and instructional
strategies aligned to the state's essential academic learning requirements in
science.

(4) The amount
of allocations shall be determined in the omnibus appropriations act.

(((4))) (5)
The state schools for the deaf and blind are eligible to receive allocations
under this section.

(((5))) (6)
The superintendent of public instruction may adopt timelines and rules as
necessary under chapter 34.05 RCW to administer the program, and require that
schools and districts submit reports regarding the use of the funds.

Sec. 2. RCW 70.105D.070 and 2001
c 27 s 2 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) The state toxics
control account and the local toxics control account are hereby created in the
state treasury.

(2) The following
moneys shall be deposited into the state toxics control account: (a) Those
revenues which are raised by the tax imposed under RCW 82.21.030 and which are
attributable to that portion of the rate equal to thirty-three one-hundredths
of one percent; (b) the costs of remedial actions recovered under this chapter
or chapter 70.105A RCW; (c) penalties collected or recovered under this
chapter; and (d) any other money appropriated or transferred to the account by
the legislature. Moneys in the account may be used only to carry out the
purposes of this chapter, including but not limited to the following
activities:

(i) The state's
responsibility for hazardous waste planning, management, regulation,
enforcement, technical assistance, and public education required under chapter
70.105 RCW;

(ii) The state's
responsibility for solid waste planning, management, regulation, enforcement,
technical assistance, and public education required under chapter 70.95 RCW;

(iii) The hazardous
waste cleanup program required under this chapter;

(iv) State matching
funds required under the federal cleanup law;

(v) Financial
assistance for local programs in accordance with chapters 70.95, 70.95C,
70.95I, and 70.105 RCW;

(vi) State government
programs for the safe reduction, recycling, or disposal of hazardous wastes
from households, small businesses, and agriculture;

(vii) Hazardous
materials emergency response training;

(viii) Water and
environmental health protection and monitoring programs;

(ix) Programs
authorized under chapter 70.146 RCW;

(x) ((A public
participation program, including regional citizen advisory committees)) K-12
science education programs administered by the office of the superintendent of
public instruction;

(xi) Public funding to
assist potentially liable persons to pay for the costs of remedial action in
compliance with cleanup standards under RCW 70.105D.030(2)(e) but only when the
amount and terms of such funding are established under a settlement agreement
under RCW 70.105D.040(4) and when the director has found that the funding will
achieve both (A) a substantially more expeditious or enhanced cleanup than
would otherwise occur, and (B) the prevention or mitigation of unfair economic
hardship; and

(xii) Development and
demonstration of alternative management technologies designed to carry out the
top two hazardous waste management priorities of RCW 70.105.150.

(3) The following
moneys shall be deposited into the local toxics control account: Those
revenues which are raised by the tax imposed under RCW 82.21.030 and which are
attributable to that portion of the rate equal to thirty-seven one-hundredths
of one percent.

(a) Moneys deposited in
the local toxics control account shall be used by the department for grants or
loans to local governments for the following purposes in descending order of
priority: (i) Remedial actions; (ii) hazardous waste plans and programs under
chapter 70.105 RCW; (iii) solid waste plans and programs under chapters 70.95,
70.95C, 70.95I, and 70.105 RCW; (iv) funds for a program to assist in the
assessment and cleanup of sites of methamphetamine production, but not to be
used for the initial containment of such sites, consistent with the
responsibilities and intent of RCW 69.50.511; and (v) cleanup and disposal of
hazardous substances from abandoned or derelict vessels that pose a threat to
human health or the environment. For purposes of this subsection (3)(a)(v),
"abandoned or derelict vessels" means vessels that have little or no
value and either have no identified owner or have an identified owner lacking
financial resources to clean up and dispose of the vessel. Funds for plans and
programs shall be allocated consistent with the priorities and matching
requirements established in chapters 70.105, 70.95C, 70.95I, and 70.95 RCW.
During the 1999-2001 fiscal biennium, moneys in the account may also be used
for the following activities: Conducting a study of whether dioxins occur in
fertilizers, soil amendments, and soils; reviewing applications for
registration of fertilizers; and conducting a study of plant uptake of metals.

(b) Funds may also be
appropriated to the department of health to implement programs to reduce
testing requirements under the federal safe drinking water act for public water
systems. The department of health shall reimburse the account from fees
assessed under RCW 70.119A.115 by June 30, 1995.

(4) Except for
unanticipated receipts under RCW 43.79.260 through 43.79.282, moneys in the
state and local toxics control accounts may be spent only after appropriation
by statute.

(5) One percent of the
moneys deposited into the state and local toxics control accounts shall be ((allocated
only for public participation grants to persons who may be adversely affected
by a release or threatened release of a hazardous substance and to
not-for-profit public interest organizations. The primary purpose of these
grants is to facilitate the participation by persons and organizations in the
investigation and remedying of releases or threatened releases of hazardous
substances and to implement the state's solid and hazardous waste management
priorities. However, during the 1999-2001 fiscal biennium, funding may not be
granted to entities engaged in lobbying activities, and applicants may not be
awarded grants if their cumulative grant awards under this section exceed two
hundred thousand dollars. No grant may exceed sixty thousand dollars. Grants
may be renewed annually)) appropriated to the office of the
superintendent of public instruction, to be used solely for grants to school
districts for instructional materials for science education, in amounts and in
a manner identified by the superintendent of public instruction, and for
school-based instructional programs provided by the pacific science center.
Priority in making grants to school districts for science education is given to
projects and curricula emphasizing safe management of hazardous waste and water
and environmental health protection. Moneys appropriated for ((public
participation)) science education from either account which are not
expended at the close of any biennium shall revert to the state toxics control
account.

(6) No moneys deposited
into either the state or local toxics control account may be used for solid
waste incinerator feasibility studies, construction, maintenance, or operation.

(7) The department
shall adopt rules for grant or loan issuance and performance.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 3. This act takes effect
July 1, 2002.

---
END ---