BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF
WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec.
1. (1) The joint task force
on permit streamlining is created to evaluate the effectiveness of state land
use, planning, environmental, and permitting statutes to coordinate and
streamline permit review processes and to consider whether any changes are needed
to these laws to facilitate such coordination and streamlining, while ensuring
protection of the environment.

(2) The joint task
force shall consist of the following twelve legislative members:

(a) Six members of the
house of representatives, three from the majority party and three from the
minority party, appointed by the speaker of the house of representatives; and

(b) Six members of the
senate, three from the majority party and three from the minority party,
appointed by the majority leader of the senate.

(3) The joint task
force may appoint an advisory committee of advisors and experts to provide
input on various subjects. For purposes of this subsection, "advisors and
experts" includes, but is not limited to, representatives of: Cities;
counties; environmental groups; business organizations; building industry; land
use planners, attorneys, and consultants; tribes; the office of the governor;
and state agencies with planning functions and/or permit authority.

(4) Members of the
joint task force shall be reimbursed for travel expenses as provided in RCW 44.04.120.
The staff of senate committee services and the office of program research of
the house of representatives shall staff the joint task force.

(5) The joint task
force shall be cochaired by one senator and one state representative appointed
by the senate majority leader and the speaker of the house of representatives
respectively.

(6) Any final findings,
conclusions, or recommendations of the joint task force must be agreed to by a
majority of the members; however, minority findings, conclusions, or
recommendations may be included that are submitted by any member or group of
members.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
2. (1) The joint task force
on permit streamlining shall consider the following objectives:

(a) Development of a
coordinated permit process for all required project permits. This process must
be applied with certainty, consistency, and assurance of swift permit action,
while ensuring environmental protection and best management practices;

(b) Improvement in the
coordination of state and local agencies in reviewing and responding to project
permit applications;

(c) Reduction in delays
associated with project permit review so that permit decisions are made in a
timely and predictable manner;

(d) Enhancement of
state and local agencies' responsiveness to concerns about project review
processes and decisions from project permit applicants or interested parties;

(e) Identification of
resource problems that affect the ability of permitting agencies to issue
permits in a timely manner; and

(f) Examination of a
means to expedite permit processing when more stringent environmental standards
are agreed upon.

(2) The joint task
force shall make recommendations for legislation and policy regarding the
objectives identified in subsection (1) of this section.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
3. The joint task force
shall commence May 1, 2002, and present a final report and any legislative
proposals to the legislature by January 10, 2003.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
4. This act is necessary for
the immediate preservation of the public peace, health, or safety, or support
of the state government and its existing public institutions, and takes effect
immediately.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 5. This act expires June 1,
2003.

---
END ---