BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF
WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1. RCW 46.20.265 and 1998 c
41 s 2 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) In addition to any
other authority to revoke driving privileges under this chapter, the department
shall revoke all driving privileges of a juvenile when the department receives
notice from a court pursuant to RCW 9.41.040(5), 9A.56.030(3),
13.40.265, 66.44.365, 69.41.065, 69.50.420, 69.52.070, or a substantially
similar municipal ordinance adopted by a local legislative authority, or from a
diversion unit pursuant to RCW 13.40.265. The revocation shall be imposed
without hearing.

(2) The driving privileges
of the juvenile revoked under subsection (1) of this section shall be revoked
in the following manner:

(a) Upon receipt of the
first notice, the department shall impose a revocation for one year, or until
the juvenile reaches seventeen years of age, whichever is longer.

(b) Upon receipt of a
second or subsequent notice, the department shall impose a revocation for two
years or until the juvenile reaches eighteen years of age, whichever is longer.

(c) Each offense for
which the department receives notice shall result in a separate period of
revocation. All periods of revocation imposed under this section that could
otherwise overlap shall run consecutively and no period of revocation imposed
under this section shall begin before the expiration of all other periods of
revocation imposed under this section or other law.

(3) If the department
receives notice from a court that the juvenile's privilege to drive should be
reinstated, the department shall immediately reinstate any driving privileges
that have been revoked under this section if the minimum term of revocation as
specified in RCW 13.40.265(1)(c), 66.44.365(3), 69.41.065(3), 69.50.420(3),
69.52.070(3), or similar ordinance has expired, and subject to subsection
(2)(c) of this section.

(4)(a) If the
department receives notice pursuant to RCW 13.40.265(2)(b) from a diversion
unit that a juvenile has completed a diversion agreement for which the
juvenile's driving privileges were revoked, the department shall reinstate any
driving privileges revoked under this section as provided in (b) of this
subsection, subject to subsection (2)(c) of this section.

(b) If the diversion
agreement was for the juvenile's first violation of chapter 66.44, 69.41,
69.50, or 69.52 RCW, the department shall not reinstate the juvenile's
privilege to drive until the later of ninety days after the date the juvenile
turns sixteen or ninety days after the juvenile entered into a diversion
agreement for the offense. If the diversion agreement was for the juvenile's
second or subsequent violation of chapter 66.44, 69.41, 69.50, or 69.52 RCW,
the department shall not reinstate the juvenile's privilege to drive until the
later of the date the juvenile turns seventeen or one year after the juvenile
entered into the second or subsequent diversion agreement.

Sec. 2. RCW 9A.56.030 and 1995 c
129 s 11 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) A person is guilty
of theft in the first degree if he or she commits theft of:

(a) Property or
services which exceed(s) one thousand five hundred dollars in value other than
a firearm as defined in RCW 9.41.010; or

(b) Property of any
value other than a firearm as defined in RCW 9.41.010 taken from the person of
another.

(2) Theft in the first
degree is a class B felony.

(3) A
juvenile convicted of motor vehicle theft in the first degree under this
section shall also have driving privileges revoked in accordance with RCW
46.20.265. Upon conviction, the court shall immediately transmit conviction
data to the department of licensing necessary for the administration of RCW
46.20.265.

---
END ---