BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF
WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1. RCW 29.79.080 and 1982 c
116 s 8 are each amended to read as follows:

The person proposing
the measure shall print blank petitions upon single sheets of paper of good
writing quality (including but not limited to newsprint) not less than ((eleven))
eight and one-half inches in width and not less than ((fourteen))
eleven inches in length. Each petition at the time of circulating,
signing, and filing with the secretary of state shall consist of not more than
one sheet with numbered lines for not more than twenty signatures, with the
prescribed warning and title, shall be in the form required by RCW 29.79.090,
29.79.100, or 29.79.110, ((as now or hereafter amended,)) and shall have
a full, true, and correct copy of the proposed measure referred to therein printed
on the reverse side of the petition.

The
secretary of state shall adopt rules establishing readability standards,
including, but not limited to, the minimum font size of the text used on the
petitions.

--- END ---