BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF
WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1. RCW 36.70A.060 and 1998
c 286 s 5 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) Each county that is
required or chooses to plan under RCW 36.70A.040, and each city within such
county, shall adopt development regulations on or before September 1, 1991, to
assure the conservation of agricultural, forest, and mineral resource lands
designated under RCW 36.70A.170. Regulations adopted under this subsection may
not prohibit uses legally existing on any parcel prior to their adoption and
shall remain in effect until the county or city adopts development regulations
pursuant to RCW 36.70A.040. Such regulations shall assure that the use of
lands adjacent to agricultural, forest, or mineral resource lands shall not
interfere with the continued use, in the accustomed manner and in accordance
with best management practices, of these designated lands for the production of
food, agricultural products, or timber, or for the extraction of minerals. Nothing
in this chapter may be construed as preventing a county or city from allowing
agricultural lands that are not currently being used in commercial production
from being used for recreational activities, including, but not limited to,
playing fields for sports played on grass, provided that no permanent
structures are erected on the agricultural land. Counties and cities shall
require that all plats, short plats, development permits, and building permits
issued for development activities on, or within five hundred feet of, lands
designated as agricultural lands, forest lands, or mineral resource lands,
contain a notice that the subject property is within or near designated
agricultural lands, forest lands, or mineral resource lands on which a variety
of commercial activities may occur that are not compatible with residential
development for certain periods of limited duration. The notice for mineral
resource lands shall also inform that an application might be made for
mining-related activities, including mining, extraction, washing, crushing,
stockpiling, blasting, transporting, and recycling of minerals.

(2) Each county and
city shall adopt development regulations that protect critical areas that are
required to be designated under RCW 36.70A.170. For counties and cities that
are required or choose to plan under RCW 36.70A.040, such development
regulations shall be adopted on or before September 1, 1991. For the remainder
of the counties and cities, such development regulations shall be adopted on or
before March 1, 1992.

(3) Such counties and
cities shall review these designations and development regulations when
adopting their comprehensive plans under RCW 36.70A.040 and implementing
development regulations under RCW 36.70A.120 and may alter such designations
and development regulations to insure consistency.

(4) Forest land and
agricultural land located within urban growth areas shall not be designated by
a county or city as forest land or agricultural land of long-term commercial
significance under RCW 36.70A.170 unless the city or county has enacted a
program authorizing transfer or purchase of development rights.

Sec. 2. RCW 36.70A.177 and 1997
c 429 s 23 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) A county or a city
may use a variety of innovative zoning techniques in areas designated as
agricultural lands of long-term commercial significance under RCW 36.70A.170.
The innovative zoning techniques should be designed to conserve agricultural lands
and encourage the agricultural economy. A county or city should encourage
nonagricultural uses to be limited to lands with poor soils or otherwise not
suitable for agricultural purposes.

(2) Innovative zoning
techniques a county or city may consider include, but are not limited to:

(a) Agricultural
zoning, which limits the density of development and restricts or prohibits
nonfarm uses of agricultural land;

(b) Cluster zoning,
which allows new development on one portion of the land, leaving the remainder
in agricultural or open space uses;

(c) Large lot zoning,
which establishes as a minimum lot size the amount of land necessary to achieve
a successful farming practice;

(d) Quarter/quarter
zoning, which permits one residential dwelling on a one-acre minimum lot for
each one-sixteenth of a section of land; and

(e) Sliding scale
zoning, which allows the number of lots for single-family residential purposes
with a minimum lot size of one acre to increase inversely as the size of the
total acreage increases.

(3) A
county or city may permit agricultural lands that are not currently being used
in commercial production to be used for recreational activities, including, but
not limited to, playing fields for sports played on grass, provided that no
permanent structures are erected on the agricultural land.

---
END ---