BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF
WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec.
1. The legislature finds
that nonprofit youth organizations provide a variety of services for the youth
of Washington state, including many services that enable young people,
especially those facing challenging and disadvantaged circumstances, to realize
their full potential as productive, responsible, and caring citizens. The
legislature also finds that the efficiency and quality of these services may be
enhanced by the provision of safe, reliable, and sound facilities, and that, in
certain cases, it may be appropriate for the state to assist in the development
of these facilities.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
2. A new section is added
to chapter 43.63A RCW to read as follows:

(1) The department of
community, trade, and economic development must establish a competitive process
to solicit proposals for and prioritize projects whose primary objective is to
assist nonprofit youth organizations in acquiring, constructing, or
rehabilitating facilities used for the delivery of nonresidential services,
excluding outdoor athletic fields.

(2) The department of
community, trade, and economic development must establish a competitive process
to prioritize applications for the assistance as follows:

(a) The department of
community, trade, and economic development must conduct a statewide
solicitation of project applications from local governments, nonprofit
organizations, and other entities, as determined by the department of
community, trade, and economic development. The department of community,
trade, and economic development must evaluate and rank applications in
consultation with a citizen advisory committee using objective criteria.
Projects must have a major recreational component, and must have either an
educational or social service component. At a minimum, applicants must
demonstrate that the requested assistance will increase the efficiency or
quality of the services it provides to youth. The evaluation and ranking
process shall also include an examination of existing assets that applicants
may apply to projects. Grant assistance under this section shall not exceed
twenty-five percent of the total cost of the project. The nonstate portion of
the total project cost may include cash, the value of real property when
acquired solely for the purpose of the project, and in-kind contributions.

(b) The department of
community, trade, and economic development must submit a prioritized list of
recommended projects to the governor and the legislature in the department of
community, trade, and economic development's biennial capital budget request
beginning with the 2003-2005 biennium and thereafter. The list must include a
description of each project, the amount of recommended state funding, and
documentation of nonstate funds to be used for the project. The total amount
of recommended state funding for projects on a biennial project list must not
exceed two million dollars. The department of community, trade, and economic
development may provide an additional alternate project list that must not
exceed five hundred thousand dollars. Except for the 2001-2003 biennium, the
department of community, trade, and economic development may not sign contracts
or otherwise financially obligate funds under this section until the
legislature has approved a specific list of projects.

(c) If an appropriation
is made in chapter ... (House/Senate Bill No. ..., the supplemental capital
budget), Laws of 2002, for the program created in this section, the department
of community, trade, and economic development must conduct a solicitation and
ranking process as described in (a) of this subsection, but need not submit
this list to the governor and legislature for approval. The total amount of
recommended state funding for projects listed under this subsection must not
exceed two hundred fifty thousand dollars.

(d) In contracts for
grants authorized under this section the department of community, trade, and
economic development must include provisions that require that capital
improvements be held by the grantee for a specified period of time appropriate
to the amount of the grant and that facilities be used for the express purpose
of the grant. If the grantee is found to be out of compliance with provisions
of the contract, the grantee must repay to the state general fund the principal
amount of the grant plus interest calculated at the rate of interest on state
of Washington general obligation bonds issued most closely to the date of
authorization of the grant.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 3. This act is necessary for
the immediate preservation of the public peace, health, or safety, or support
of the state government and its existing public institutions, and takes effect
immediately.

---
END ---