BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF
WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec.
1. (1) The Washington state
public facilities siting council is created and members are to be appointed by
the governor as follows:

(a) The director of
community, trade, and economic development, or a designee;

(b) A member of the
transportation commission, who shall be chair;

(c) Two members of the
general public with knowledge or expertise in airport issues; and

(d) A member of the
growth management hearings board.

The chair of the
council may designate another councilmember to serve as the acting chair in the
absence of the chair. The department of transportation shall provide
administrative and staff support for the council.

The public facilities
siting council is created when the criteria of section 3 of this act are met.

(2) The Washington
state public facilities siting council appointed in response to a specific
finding of an impasse under section 2 of this act must be disbanded once the
governor has informed the council of his or her decision under section 4 of
this act regarding the council's airport siting recommendations concerning the
impasse. If, at a later date, the transportation commission declares another
impasse the governor shall appoint another siting council consistent with
subsection (1) of this section.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
2. If the state
transportation commission finds that all of either subsection (1) or (2) of
this section have occurred, it shall declare an impasse and refer the issue to
the Washington state public facilities siting council:

(1)(a) A regional
transportation plan does not satisfactorily address the state's interest as
defined in RCW 47.06.040 with respect to planning for transportation needs
through siting of an airport; (b) there has been ample time to address siting
of an airport in the regional transportation plan and local comprehensive
plans, but either no decision has been reached or the process has resulted in a
decision that will not address the state's transportation needs as set forth in
RCW 47.06.040; (c) the department of transportation has sought by all
reasonable means to encourage local governments and regional bodies to
cooperate in the planning and decision-making process defined under RCW
36.70A.200 that addresses in a timely manner statewide airport siting needs;
(d) the transportation commission has notified the local governments and
regional bodies responsible for the regional transportation plan of its intent
to declare an impasse; and (e) the local governments and regional bodies
responsible for the regional transportation plan have failed to show cause
within thirty days of such notification that an impasse should not be declared;
or

(2) No supplemental airport
of statewide significance to Seattle-Tacoma International Airport has been
sited by August 1, 2002.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
3. (1) The Washington state
public facilities siting council shall convene to make recommendations to the
governor whenever the transportation commission passes a resolution declaring
that an impasse exists in the siting of an airport of statewide significance,
as provided in section 2 of this act. The council has eighteen months after
the date on which the transportation commission resolution is passed to make a
recommendation regarding the specific siting of the airport of statewide
significance and to communicate its recommendation in writing to the governor.

(2) The responsibility
of the council is to make airport siting recommendations that reflect the
interest of the entire state. Accordingly, the council is not limited to the
options examined by the regional or local authority, and may also consider
alternative sites outside the region. In forming its recommendation the
council shall review existing information and analyses regarding the siting
issue, including both technical data and the decision-making process that
failed to produce a resolution. The council may also hire staff for technical evaluation,
analysis, and research associated with the preparation of its siting
recommendations. The council may also consider relationships between the
proposed facility and other existing or planned transportation facilities of
statewide interest such as airports, rail services, ferry systems, or highways.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
4. (1) The governor must
accept or reject the siting council's recommendation within sixty days. If the
governor rejects the siting council's recommendation, the governor may request
the siting council to provide an alternative recommendation within thirty
days. The governor has another sixty days to accept or reject the siting
council's alternative recommendation. Once the governor has made a decision,
the governor must inform in writing the members of the siting council, the
transportation commission, the chair or chairs of the legislative
transportation committee, the county or city affected, and the regional
transportation planning organization located in the region in which the
transportation project will be sited.

(2) Subject to the
conditions set forth in section 6(2) of this act, a decision by the governor
binds the state and each of the political subdivisions in the county where the
project will be sited, regarding the approval of a site and the construction
and operation of a proposed airport.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
5. The legislature may
invalidate the governor's decision if two-thirds of each house votes to object
to the governor's choice of sites. If the legislature does not act to
invalidate by the end of the legislative session convened after the governor's
decision, the decision shall be deemed valid.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
6. (1) This chapter
supersedes other laws for establishing the location of airports of statewide
significance or rules adopted under state law for establishing the location of
airports of statewide significance.

(2) However, the
requirements of this chapter and rules adopted under it do not supersede the
state environmental policy act, the state clean air act, the state clean water
act, the shoreline management act, the laws relating to solid and hazardous
waste management, and all the related portions of the Washington administrative
code that implement these environmental laws.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
7. The regional
transportation planning organization planning under chapter 47.80 RCW must
adopt a regional transportation plan that adequately implements the decision of
the governor to site an airport of statewide significance, as provided in
section 5 of this act.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
8. The legislature declares
to be of statewide significance any airports designated by the department of
transportation as included in its plan under RCW 47.06.040 as determined by its
own functional classification system and criteria. The department of
transportation shall assert leadership and cooperate with regional
transportation planning organizations, counties, cities, transit agencies,
public ports, and the private sector, by including in the state's multimodal
transportation plan improvements to transportation facilities and services of
statewide significance. Improvements to facilities and services of statewide
significance identified in the statewide multimodal transportation plan developed
under RCW 47.01.071(3) are considered essential public facilities under RCW
36.70A.200.

Sec. 9. RCW 36.70A.200 and 2001
2nd sp.s. c 12 s 205 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) The comprehensive
plan of each county and city that is planning under RCW 36.70A.040 shall
include a process for identifying and siting essential public facilities.
Essential public facilities include those facilities that are typically
difficult to site, such as airports, state education facilities and state or
regional transportation facilities as defined in RCW 47.06.140, state and local
correctional facilities, solid waste handling facilities, and in-patient
facilities including substance abuse facilities, mental health facilities,
group homes, and secure community transition facilities as defined in RCW
71.09.020. If the process for siting an airport of statewide significance
fails, the airport must be sited by the process set forth in sections 1 through
8 and 11 of this act.

(2) Each county and
city planning under RCW 36.70A.040 shall, not later than the deadline specified
in RCW 36.70A.130, establish a process, or amend its existing process, for
identifying and siting essential public facilities, and adopt or amend its
development regulations as necessary to provide for the siting of secure
community transition facilities consistent with statutory requirements
applicable to these facilities.

(3) Any city or county
not planning under RCW 36.70A.040 shall, not later than the deadline specified
in RCW 36.70A.130, establish a process for siting secure community transition
facilities and adopt or amend its development regulations as necessary to
provide for the siting of such facilities consistent with statutory
requirements applicable to these facilities.

(4) The office of
financial management shall maintain a list of those essential state public
facilities that are required or likely to be built within the next six years.
The office of financial management may at any time add facilities to the list.

(5) No local
comprehensive plan or development regulation may preclude the siting of
essential public facilities.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
10. The sum of five hundred
thousand dollars, or as much thereof as may be necessary, is appropriated for
the biennium ending June 30, 2003, from the multimodal fund to the department
of transportation for the purposes of section 3 of this act.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
11. This chapter may be known
and cited as the Washington state public facilities siting act.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 12. Sections 1 through 8 and
11 of this act constitute a new chapter in Title 43 RCW.

---
END ---