BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF
WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec.
1. A new section is added
to chapter 29.79 RCW to read as follows:

(1) The office of
financial management, in consultation with the secretary of state, the
department of revenue, other state agencies, selected local governments and
associations of local governments, and legislative fiscal staff, when
appropriate, shall prepare a fiscal impact statement for each:

(a) Initiative to the
people certified for the ballot under RCW 29.79.230;

(b) Initiative to the
legislature certified for the ballot under RCW 29.79.270;

(c) Alternative measure
certified for the ballot under RCW 29.79.280;

(d) Referendum bill
referred to voters by the legislature under RCW 29.79.250; and

(e) Referendum measure
certified for the ballot under RCW 29.79.230.

(2) Each fiscal impact
statement must describe any projected increases or decreases in revenues, costs,
expenditures, or indebtedness that the state and local governments will
experience if the ballot measure is approved by voters. The fiscal impact
statement must include a summary not exceeding one hundred words and a more
detailed statement that includes the assumptions that were made to develop the
fiscal impacts. The fiscal impact statement must be written in clear and
concise language and avoid legal and technical terms when possible, and may
include easy to understand graphics. Where appropriate, the fiscal impact
statement may include both estimated dollar amounts and a description placing
the estimated dollar amounts into context.

Sec. 2. RCW 29.81.240 and 1999 c
260 s 4 are each amended to read as follows:

Committees shall write
and submit arguments advocating the approval or rejection of each statewide
ballot issue ((and)), rebuttals of those arguments, and
statements responding to each fiscal impact statement prepared by the office of
financial management. The secretary of state, the presiding officer of the
senate, and the presiding officer of the house of representatives shall appoint
the initial two members of each committee. In making these committee
appointments the secretary of state and presiding officers of the senate and
house of representatives shall consider legislators, sponsors of initiatives
and referendums, and other interested groups known to advocate or oppose the
ballot measure.

The initial two members
may select up to four additional members, and the committee shall elect a
chairperson. The remaining committee member or members may fill vacancies
through appointment.

After the committee
submits its initial ((argument statements)) arguments advocating the
approval or rejection of the ballot measure to the secretary of state, the
secretary of state shall transmit the ((statements)) arguments to
the opposite committee. The opposite committee may then prepare rebuttal
arguments. Rebuttals may not interject new points.

The voters' pamphlet
may contain only argument statements prepared according to this section.
Arguments may contain graphs and charts supported by factual statistical data
and pictures or other illustrations. Cartoons or caricatures are not
permitted.

Sec. 3. RCW 29.81.250 and 1999 c
260 s 5 are each amended to read as follows:

The secretary of state
shall determine the format and layout of the voters' pamphlet. The secretary
of state shall print the pamphlet in clear, readable type on a size, quality,
and weight of paper that in the judgment of the secretary of state best serves
the voters. The pamphlet must contain a table of contents. Federal and state
offices must appear in the pamphlet in the same sequence as they appear on the
ballot. Measures and arguments must be printed in the order specified by RCW
29.79.300.

The voters' pamphlet
must provide the following information for each statewide issue on the ballot:

(1) The legal
identification of the measure by serial designation or number;

(2) The official ballot
title of the measure;

(3) A statement
prepared by the attorney general explaining the law as it presently exists;

(4) A statement
prepared by the attorney general explaining the effect of the proposed measure
if it becomes law;

(5) A summary
prepared by the office of financial management explaining the fiscal impact of
the proposed measure if it becomes law, not to exceed one hundred words;

(6) The total
number of votes cast for and against the measure in the senate and house of
representatives, if the measure has been passed by the legislature;

(((6))) (7)
An argument advocating the voters' approval of the measure together with any
statement in rebuttal of the opposing argument;

(((7))) (8)
An argument advocating the voters' rejection of the measure together with any
statement in rebuttal of the opposing argument;

(((8))) (9) A
statement from each committee responding to the fiscal impact statement
prepared by the office of financial management;

(10) Each
argument ((or)), rebuttal statement, and response statement
must be followed by the names of the committee members who submitted them, and
may be followed by a telephone number that citizens may call to obtain
information on the ballot measure;

(((9))) (11)
The full text of each measure.

Sec. 4. RCW 29.81.280 and 1999 c
260 s 8 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) If in the opinion
of the secretary of state any argument or statement offered for inclusion in
the voters' pamphlet in support of or opposition to a measure or candidate,
or in response to a fiscal impact statement, contains obscene matter or
matter that is otherwise prohibited by law from distribution through the mail,
the secretary may petition the superior court of Thurston County for a judicial
determination that the argument or statement may be rejected for publication or
edited to delete the matter. The court shall not enter such an order unless it
concludes that the matter is obscene or otherwise prohibited for distribution
through the mail.

(2)(a) A person who
believes that he or she may be defamed by an argument or statement offered for
inclusion in the voters' pamphlet in support of or opposition to a measure or
candidate may petition the superior court of Thurston County for a judicial
determination that the argument or statement may be rejected for publication or
edited to delete the defamatory ((statement)) matter.

(b) The court shall not
enter such an order unless it concludes that the argument or statement
is untrue and that the petitioner has a very substantial likelihood of
prevailing in a defamation action.

(c) An action under
this subsection (2) must be filed and served no later than the tenth day after
the deadline for the submission of the argument or statement to the secretary
of state.

(d) If the secretary of
state notifies a person named or identified in an argument or statement of the
contents of the argument or statement within three days after the deadline for
submission to the secretary, then neither the state nor the secretary is liable
for damages resulting from publication of the argument or statement unless the
secretary publishes the argument or statement in violation of an order entered
under this section. Nothing in this section creates a duty on the part of the
secretary of state to identify, locate, or notify the person.

(3) Parties to a
dispute under this section may agree to resolve the dispute by rephrasing the
argument or statement, even if the deadline for submission to the secretary has
elapsed, unless the secretary determines that the process of publication is too
far advanced to permit the change. The secretary shall promptly provide any
such revision to any committee entitled to submit a rebuttal argument. If that
committee has not yet submitted its rebuttal, its deadline to submit a rebuttal
is extended by five days. If it has submitted a rebuttal, it may revise it to
address the change within five days of the filing of the revised argument with
the secretary.

(4) In an action under
this section the committee or candidate must be named as a defendant, and may
be served with process by certified mail directed to the address contained in
the secretary's records for that party. The secretary of state shall be a
nominal party to an action brought under subsection (2) of this section, solely
for the purpose of determining the content of the voters' pamphlet. The
superior court shall give such an action priority on its calendar.

Sec. 5. RCW 29.81.290 and 1999 c
260 s 9 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) An argument or
statement submitted to the secretary of state for publication in the voters'
pamphlet is not available for public inspection or copying until:

(a) In the case of
candidate statements, (i) all statements by all candidates who have filed for a
particular office have been received, except those who informed the secretary
that they will not submit statements, or (ii) the deadline for submission of
statements has elapsed;

(b) In the case of
arguments supporting or opposing a measure, (i) the arguments on both sides
have been received, unless a committee was not appointed for one side, or (ii)
the deadline for submission of arguments has elapsed; ((and))

(c) In the case of
rebuttal arguments, (i) the rebuttals on both sides have been received, unless
a committee was not appointed for one side, or (ii) the deadline for submission
of arguments has elapsed; and

(d) In the case of
statements written in response to fiscal impact statements, (i) the statements
on both sides have been received, unless a committee was not appointed for one
side, or (ii) the deadline for submission of statements has elapsed.

(2) Nothing in this
section prohibits the secretary from releasing information under RCW
29.81.280(2)(d).

Sec. 6. RCW 29.81.310 and 1999 c
260 s 11 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) The maximum number
of words for statements submitted by candidates is as follows: State
representative, one hundred words; state senator, judge of the superior court,
judge of the court of appeals, justice of the supreme court, and all state
offices voted upon throughout the state, except that of governor, two hundred
words; president and vice-president, United States senator, United States
representative, and governor, three hundred words.

(2) Arguments written
by committees under RCW ((29.81.230)) 29.81.240 may not exceed
two hundred fifty words in length.

(3) Rebuttal arguments
written by committees may not exceed seventy-five words in length.

(4) Statements from
committees responding to fiscal impact statements may not exceed seventy-five
words in length.

(5)
The secretary of state shall allocate space in the pamphlet based on the number
of candidates or nominees for each office.

---
END ---