BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF
WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec.
1. A new section is added
to chapter 28A.185 RCW to read as follows:

In order to ensure that
school districts are meeting the requirements of an approved program for highly
capable students, the superintendent of public instruction shall monitor highly
capable programs at least once every five years. Monitoring shall begin during
the 2002-03 school year.

Any program review and
monitoring under this section may be conducted concurrently with other program
reviews and monitoring conducted by the office of the superintendent of public
instruction. In its review, the office shall monitor program components that
include but need not be limited to the process used by the district to identify
and reach out to highly capable students with diverse talents and from diverse
backgrounds, and district expenditures used to enrich or expand opportunities
for these students.

The
superintendent of public instruction may adopt rules under chapter 34.05 RCW to
implement this section.

--- END ---