BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF
WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec.
1. A new section is added
to chapter 28B.15 RCW to read as follows:

(1) Subject to the
limitations of RCW 28B.15.910, the governing boards of the state universities,
the regional universities, and The Evergreen State College may waive up to half
of all tuition and fees established under this chapter for certificated
instructional staff who are either teaching or employed as educational staff
associates in the state's public schools and who are enrolled in a program
leading to a master's degree.

(2) When awarding any
tuition and fee waiver authorized under this chapter, the state universities,
regional universities, and The Evergreen State College shall give priority to
certificated instructional staff who qualify for a waiver under subsection (1)
of this section.

Sec. 2. RCW 28B.15.910 and 2000
c 152 s 3 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) For the purpose of
providing state general fund support to public institutions of higher
education, except for revenue waived under programs listed in subsections (3)
and (4) of this section, and unless otherwise expressly provided in the omnibus
state appropriations act, the total amount of operating fees revenue waived,
exempted, or reduced by a state university, a regional university, The
Evergreen State College, or the community colleges as a whole, shall not exceed
the percentage of total gross authorized operating fees revenue in this
subsection. As used in this section, "gross authorized operating fees
revenue" means the estimated gross operating fees revenue as estimated
under RCW 82.33.020 or as revised by the office of financial management, before
granting any waivers. This limitation applies to all tuition waiver programs
established before or after July 1, 1992.

(a) University of
Washington 21 percent

(b) Washington State
University 20 percent

(c) Eastern Washington
University 11 percent

(d) Central Washington
University 8 percent

(e) Western Washington
University 10 percent

(f) The Evergreen State
College 6 percent

(g) Community colleges
as a whole 35 percent

(2) The limitations in
subsection (1) of this section apply to waivers, exemptions, or reductions in
operating fees contained in the following:

(a) RCW 28B.10.265;

(b) RCW 28B.15.014;

(c) RCW 28B.15.100;

(d) RCW 28B.15.225;

(e) RCW 28B.15.380;

(f) RCW 28B.15.520;

(g) RCW 28B.15.526;

(h) RCW 28B.15.527;

(i) RCW 28B.15.543;

(j) RCW 28B.15.545;

(k) RCW 28B.15.555;

(l) RCW 28B.15.556;

(m) RCW 28B.15.615;

(n) RCW 28B.15.620;

(o) RCW 28B.15.628;

(p) RCW 28B.15.730;

(q) RCW 28B.15.740;

(r) RCW 28B.15.750;

(s) RCW 28B.15.756;

(t) RCW 28B.50.259;

(u) RCW 28B.70.050;

(v) Section 1 of
this act;

(w) RCW
28B.80.580; and

(((w))) (x)
During the 1997-99 fiscal biennium, the western interstate commission for
higher education undergraduate exchange program for students attending Eastern
Washington University.

(3) The limitations in
subsection (1) of this section do not apply to waivers, exemptions, or
reductions in services and activities fees contained in the following:

(a) RCW 28B.15.522;

(b) RCW 28B.15.540; and

(c) RCW 28B.15.558.

(4) The total amount of
operating fees revenue waived, exempted, or reduced by institutions of higher
education participating in the western interstate commission for higher
education western undergraduate exchange program under RCW 28B.15.544 shall not
exceed the percentage of total gross authorized operating fees revenue in this
subsection.

(a) Washington State
University 1 percent

(b) Eastern Washington
University 3 percent

(c)
Central Washington University 3 percent

---
END ---