BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF
WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1. RCW 64.06.020 and 1996 c
301 s 2 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) In a transaction
for the sale of residential real property, the seller shall, unless the buyer
has expressly waived the right to receive the disclosure statement, or unless
the transfer is exempt under RCW 64.06.010, deliver to the buyer a completed
real property transfer disclosure statement in the following format and that
contains, at a minimum, the following information:

INSTRUCTIONS TO THE SELLER

Please complete the
following form. Do not leave any spaces blank. If the question clearly does
not apply to the property write "NA". If the answer is
"yes" to any * items, please explain on attached sheets. Please
refer to the line number(s) of the question(s) when you provide your
explanation(s). For your protection you must date and sign each page of this
disclosure statement and each attachment. Delivery of the disclosure statement
must occur not later than five business days, unless otherwise agreed, after
mutual acceptance of a written contract to purchase between a buyer and a
seller.

NOTICE
TO THE BUYER

THE FOLLOWING DISCLOSURES
ARE MADE BY ((THE SELLER(S), CONCERNING)) SELLER ABOUT THE
CONDITION OF THE PROPERTY LOCATED AT...................

("THE PROPERTY"),
OR AS LEGALLY DESCRIBED ON ATTACHED EXHIBIT A.

((DISCLOSURES CONTAINED
IN THIS FORM ARE PROVIDED BY THE SELLER ON THE BASIS OF)) SELLER MAKES
THE FOLLOWING DISCLOSURES OF EXISTING MATERIAL FACTS OR MATERIAL DEFECTS THAT
ARE NOT APPARENT OR READILY ASCERTAINABLE TO BUYER BASED ON SELLER'S ACTUAL
KNOWLEDGE OF THE PROPERTY AT THE TIME ((THIS DISCLOSURE FORM IS COMPLETED BY
THE SELLER.)) SELLER COMPLETES THIS DISCLOSURE STATEMENT. UNLESS YOU
AND SELLER OTHERWISE AGREE IN WRITING, YOU HAVE THREE BUSINESS DAYS((,
UNLESS OTHERWISE AGREED, FROM THE SELLER'S DELIVERY OF THIS SELLER'S)) FROM
THE DAY SELLER DELIVERS THIS DISCLOSURE STATEMENT TO YOU TO RESCIND
((YOUR)) THE AGREEMENT BY DELIVERING ((YOUR SEPARATE)) A
SEPARATELY SIGNED WRITTEN STATEMENT OF RESCISSION TO ((THE SELLER,
UNLESS YOU WAIVE THIS RIGHT)) SELLER. YOU MAY, HOWEVER, WAIVE THE RIGHT
TO RESCIND AT OR PRIOR TO ((ENTERING)) THE TIME YOU ENTER
INTO A SALE AGREEMENT.

THE FOLLOWING ARE
DISCLOSURES MADE BY ((THE)) SELLER AND ARE NOT THE REPRESENTATIONS OF
ANY REAL ESTATE LICENSEE OR OTHER PARTY. THIS INFORMATION IS FOR DISCLOSURE
ONLY AND IS NOT INTENDED TO BE A PART OF ANY WRITTEN AGREEMENT BETWEEN ((THE))
BUYER AND ((THE)) SELLER.

FOR A MORE COMPREHENSIVE
EXAMINATION OF THE SPECIFIC CONDITION OF THIS PROPERTY YOU ARE ADVISED TO
OBTAIN AND PAY FOR THE SERVICES OF ((A QUALIFIED SPECIALIST TO INSPECT THE
PROPERTY ON YOUR BEHALF, FOR EXAMPLE)) QUALIFIED EXPERTS TO INSPECT THE
PROPERTY, WHICH MAY INCLUDE, WITHOUT LIMITATION, ARCHITECTS, ENGINEERS,
LAND SURVEYORS, PLUMBERS, ELECTRICIANS, ROOFERS, BUILDING INSPECTORS, OR PEST
AND DRY ROT INSPECTORS. THE PROSPECTIVE BUYER AND ((THE OWNER)) SELLER
MAY WISH TO OBTAIN PROFESSIONAL ADVICE OR INSPECTIONS OF THE PROPERTY ((AND))
OR TO PROVIDE ((FOR)) APPROPRIATE PROVISIONS IN A CONTRACT
BETWEEN THEM WITH RESPECT TO ANY ADVICE, INSPECTION, DEFECTS OR WARRANTIES.

Seller
. . . . is/ . . . . is not occupying the
property.

I. SELLER'S
DISCLOSURES:

*If (("Yes"
attach a copy or explain)) you answer "Yes" to a question with
an asterisk (*), please explain your answer and attach documents, if available
and not otherwise publicly recorded. If necessary, use an attached
sheet.

1.
TITLE

[ ]Yes
[ ]No [ ]Don't knowA. Do you have legal authority to sell the
property? If no, please explain.

[ ]Yes
[ ]No [ ]Don't know*B. Is title to the property subject to any of the
following?

(1)
First right of refusal

(2)
Option

(3)
Lease or rental agreement

(4)
Life estate?

[ ]Yes
[ ]No [ ]Don't know*C. Are there any encroachments, boundary
agreements, or boundary disputes?

[ ]Yes
[ ]No [ ]Don't know*D. Are there any rights of way, easements, or
access limitations that may affect the ((owner's)) Buyer's use of
the property?

[ ]Yes
[ ]No [ ]Don't know*E. Are there any written agreements for joint
maintenance of an easement or right of way?

[ ]Yes
[ ]No [ ]Don't know*F. Is there any study, survey project, or notice
that would adversely affect the property?

[ ]Yes
[ ]No [ ]Don't know*G. Are there any pending or existing assessments
against the property?

[ ]Yes
[ ]No [ ]Don't know*H. Are there any zoning violations, nonconforming
uses, or any unusual restrictions on the ((subject)) property that would
affect future construction or remodeling?

[ ]Yes
[ ]No [ ]Don't know*I. Is there a boundary survey for the property?

[ ]Yes
[ ]No [ ]Don't know*J. Are there any covenants, conditions, or
restrictions which affect the property?

2.
WATER

A.
Household Water

(1)
The source of ((the)) water for the property is:

[ ]Publicly
owned water system

[ ]Private
well serving only the subject property
. . . . . . . . .

*[ ]Other
water system

[ ]Yes
[ ]No [ ]Don't know *If
shared, are there any written agreements?

(([ ]Public
[ ]Community [ ]Private [ ]Shared

(2)
Water source information:

[ ]Yes
[ ]No [ ]Don't know *a. Are there any written agreements for
shared water source?))

[ ]Yes
[ ]No [ ]Don't know ((*b.)) *(2) Is there an
easement (recorded or unrecorded) for access to and/or maintenance of the water
source?

[ ]Yes
[ ]No [ ]Don't know ((*c.)) *(3) Are there
any known problems or repairs needed?

[ ]Yes
[ ]No [ ]Don't know ((*d. Does)) (4) During your
ownership, has the source ((provide)) provided an adequate
year round supply of potable water? If no, please explain.

[ ]Yes
[ ]No [ ]Don't know ((*(3))) *(5) Are there any
water treatment systems for the property? If yes, are they
[ ]Leased [ ]Owned

[ ]Don't know (6) If the water source is not publicly owned,
when was it last tested for water quality?

Year:
. . . . . . . . . . . . . .

B.
Irrigation

[ ]Yes
[ ]No [ ]Don't know (1) Are there any water rights for the
property?

[ ]Yes
[ ]No [ ]Don't know ((*(2) If they exist, to your knowledge,))

*(a)
If yes, have the water rights been used during the last ((five-year
period)) five years?

[ ]Yes
[ ]No [ ]Don't know ((*(3)))*(b) If so, is the
certificate available?

C.
Outdoor Sprinkler System

[ ]Yes
[ ]No [ ]Don't know (1) Is there an outdoor sprinkler system for
the property?

[ ]Yes
[ ]No [ ]Don't know ((*(2))) (2) If yes, are there
any defects in the ((outdoor sprinkler)) system? . . . . . . .

[ ]Yes
[ ]No [ ]Don't know *(3)
If yes, is the sprinkler system connected to irrigation water?

3.
SEWER/SEPTIC SYSTEM

A.
The property is served by: [ ]Public sewer main, [ ]Septic ((tank))
system (including pipes, tanks, drainfields, and all other component parts)
[ ]Other disposal system (((describe))) Please describe:

...................................

[ ]Yes
[ ]No [ ]Don't knowB. If the property is served by a public or
community sewer main, is the house connected to the main? If no, please
explain.

[ ]Yes
[ ]No [ ]Don't knowC.
Is the property ((currently subject to a sewer capacity charge)) subject
to any fees or charges in addition to those covered in your regularly billed
statement? If yes, how much? . . . . .

[ ]Yes
[ ]No [ ]Don't knowD.
If the property is connected to a septic system:

[ ]Yes
[ ]No [ ]Don't know *(1) Was a permit issued for its
construction, and was it approved by the city or county following its
construction?

(2)
When was it last pumped:

.................. ((,
19)). . .

[ ]Yes
[ ]No [ ]Don't know *(3) Are there any defects in the operation of
the septic system?

[ ]Don't know (4) When was it last inspected?

.................. ((,
19)). . .

By
Whom: ......................

[ ]Don't know (5) For how many bedrooms was the septic
system approved ((for))?

....................... bedrooms

[ ]Yes
[ ]No [ ]Don't know((*E. Do)) E. Are all plumbing
fixtures, including laundry drain, ((go)) connected to the
septic/sewer system? If no, please explain:

........................................

[ ]Yes
[ ]No [ ]Don't know*F. ((Are you aware of)) Have there been
any changes or repairs to the septic system?

[ ]Yes
[ ]No [ ]Don't knowG. Is the septic ((tank)) system((,
including the drainfield,)) located entirely within the boundaries of the
property? If no, please explain.

........................................

4.
STRUCTURAL

[ ]Yes
[ ]No [ ]Don't know*A. During your ownership, has the roof
leaked?

(([ ]Yes
[ ]No [ ]Don't knowIf yes, has it been repaired?))

[ ]Yes
[ ]No [ ]Don't know*B. During your ownership, has the basement
flooded or leaked?

[ ]Yes
[ ]No [ ]Don't know*C. During your ownership, have there been any conversions, additions, or
remodeling?

[ ]Yes
[ ]No [ ]Don't know ((*1.)) *(1) If yes, were all
building permits obtained?

[ ]Yes
[ ]No [ ]Don't know ((*2.)) *(2) If yes, were all
final inspections obtained?

(([ ]Yes
[ ]No [ ]Don't knowC. Do you know the age of the house? If yes, year
of original construction:

................................. ))

[ ]Yes
[ ]No [ ]Don't know *(3)
Have all contractors, subcontractors, suppliers, and laborers been paid?

[ ]Yes
[ ]No [ ]Don't know*D. ((Do you know of)) During your
ownership, has there been any settling, slippage, or sliding of ((either
the house or other structures/improvements located on the property? If yes,
explain:)) the property or its improvements?

((............................... ))

[ ]Yes
[ ]No [ ]Don't know*E. ((Do you know of)) Are there any
defects with the following: (If yes, please check applicable items and
explain.)

G Foundations G Decks G Exterior Walls

G Chimneys G Interior Walls G Fire Alarm

G Doors G Windows G Patio

G Ceilings G Slab Floors G Driveways

G Pools G Hot Tub G Sauna

G Sidewalks G Outbuildings G Fireplaces

G Garage Floors G Walkways G Siding

G Other G Wood Stoves

[ ]Yes
[ ]No [ ]Don't know *F. ((Was a pest or dry rot, structural or
"whole house" inspection done? When and by whom was the inspection
completed?

[ ]Yes
[ ]No [ ]Don't know *G. Since assuming ownership, has your
property had a problem with wood destroying organisms and/or have there been
any problems with pest control, infestations, or vermin?)) During your ownership, has the property had
any dry rot or pest infestation?

5.
SYSTEMS AND FIXTURES

((If))
*A. If any of the following systems or fixtures are included with the
transfer, ((do they have any existing defects:)) are there any
defects? If yes, please explain.

[ ]Yes
[ ]No [ ]Don't know ((*A.)) Electrical system, including
wiring, switches, outlets, and service

[ ]Yes
[ ]No [ ]Don't know ((*B.)) Plumbing system, including
pipes, faucets, fixtures, and toilets

[ ]Yes
[ ]No [ ]Don't know ((*C.)) Hot water tank

[ ]Yes
[ ]No [ ]Don't know ((*D.)) Garbage disposal

[ ]Yes
[ ]No [ ]Don't know ((*E.)) Appliances

[ ]Yes
[ ]No [ ]Don't know ((*F.)) Sump pump

[ ]Yes
[ ]No [ ]Don't know ((*G.)) Heating and cooling systems

[ ]Yes
[ ]No [ ]Don't know ((*H.)) Security system [ ] Owned
[ ] Leased

((*I.))
Other..................

*B.
If any of the following fixtures or property is included with the transfer, are
they leased? (If yes, please attach copy of lease.)

[ ]Yes
[ ]No [ ]Don't know Security
system . . . . . . . . .

[ ]Yes
[ ]No [ ]Don't know Tanks
(type): . . . . . . . . . .

[ ]Yes
[ ]No [ ]Don't know Satellite
dish . . . . . . . . . .

Other:
. . . . . . . . . . . . . .

6.
COMMON INTERESTS

[ ]Yes
[ ]No [ ]Don't knowA. Is there a Home Owners' Association? Name of
Association .......................

[ ]Yes
[ ]No [ ]Don't knowB. Are there regular periodic assessments:

$. . .
per [ ] Month [ ] Year

[ ]
Other......................

[ ]Yes
[ ]No [ ]Don't know*C. Are there any pending special assessments?

[ ]Yes
[ ]No [ ]Don't know*D. Are there any shared "common areas"
or any joint maintenance agreements (facilities such as walls, fences,
landscaping, pools, tennis courts, walkways, or other areas co-owned in
undivided interest with others)?

7.
GENERAL

[ ]Yes
[ ]No [ ]Don't know*A. ((Is there any settling, soil,)) During
your ownership, has there been any standing water((,)) or drainage
problems on the property?

[ ]Yes
[ ]No [ ]Don't know*B. Does the property contain any fill
material?

[ ]Yes
[ ]No [ ]Don't know*C. Is there any material damage to the property
((or any of the structure)) from fire, wind, floods, beach movements,
earthquake, expansive soils, or landslides?

[ ]Yes
[ ]No [ ]Don't knowD. Is the property in a designated flood plain?

[ ]Yes
[ ]No [ ]Don't knowE. Has the local (city or county) planning agency
designated your property as a "frequently flooded area"?

[ ]Yes
[ ]No [ ]Don't know((*E.)) *F. Are there any
substances, materials, or products on the property that may be ((an))
environmental ((hazard such as, but not limited to,)) limitations,
such as asbestos, formaldehyde, radon gas, lead-based paint, fuel or
chemical storage tanks, ((and)) mold, or contaminated soil or
water ((on the subject property))?

[ ]Yes
[ ]No [ ]Don't know((*F.)) *G. Are there any tanks or
underground storage tanks (e.g., chemical, fuel, etc.) on the property?

[ ]Yes
[ ]No [ ]Don't know((*G.)) *H. Has the property ever
been used as an illegal drug manufacturing site?

8.
MANUFACTURED AND MOBILE HOMES

If
the property includes a manufactured or mobile home for which title has not
been eliminated under chapter 65.20 RCW,

[ ]Yes
[ ]No [ ]Don't know*A. Did you make any alterations to the home? If
yes, please describe the alterations:

. . .
. . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . .

[ ]Yes
[ ]No [ ]Don't know*B. Did any previous owner make any alterations to
the home? If yes, please describe the alterations:

. . . . .
. . . . . . . . . . . . . . .

((8.))
9. FULL DISCLOSURE BY SELLERS

A.
Other conditions or defects:

[ ]Yes
[ ]No [ ]Don't know*Are there any other existing material
defects or material facts affecting ((this)) the property
((or its value that a prospective buyer should know about)) that are
not apparent or readily ascertainable to Buyer?

B.
Verification:

The
foregoing answers and attached explanations (if any) are complete and correct
to the best of my/our knowledge and I/we have received a copy hereof. I/we
authorize all of my/our real estate licensees, if any, to deliver a copy of
this disclosure statement to other real estate licensees and all prospective
buyers of the property.

DATE . . . . . . .
SELLER . . . . . . . . . SELLER...............

II. BUYER'S
ACKNOWLEDGMENT

A.((As
buyer(s), I/we acknowledge the)) Buyer hereby acknowledges that: Buyer
has a duty to pay diligent attention to any material defects ((which))
that are known to ((me/us)) Buyer or can be known to ((me/us))
Buyer by utilizing diligent attention and observation.

B.((Each
buyer acknowledges and understands that)) The disclosures set forth
in this statement and in any amendments to this statement are made only by the Seller
and not by any real estate licensee or other party.

C.Buyer
acknowledges that, pursuant to RCW 64.06.050(2), real estate licensees are not
liable for inaccurate information provided by Seller, except to the extent that
real estate licensees know of such inaccurate information.

D.This
information is for disclosure only and is not intended to be a part of the
written agreement between the Buyer and Seller.

E.Buyer
(which term includes all persons signing the "Buyer's
acceptance" portion of this disclosure statement below) ((hereby
acknowledges receipt of)) has received a copy of this Disclosure
Statement (including attachments, if any) bearing Seller's
signature.

DISCLOSURES CONTAINED IN
THIS ((FORM)) DISCLOSURE STATEMENT ARE PROVIDED BY ((THE))
SELLER BASED ON ((THE BASIS OF)) SELLER'S ACTUAL KNOWLEDGE OF THE
PROPERTY AT THE TIME ((OF DISCLOSURE. YOU, THE BUYER,)) SELLER
COMPLETES THIS DISCLOSURE STATEMENT, UNLESS BUYER AND SELLER OTHERWISE AGREE IN
WRITING, BUYER SHALL HAVE THREE BUSINESS DAYS((, UNLESS OTHERWISE
AGREED, FROM THE SELLER'S DELIVERY OF THIS SELLER'S)) FROM THE DAY SELLER
DELIVERS THIS DISCLOSURE STATEMENT TO RESCIND ((YOUR)) THE
AGREEMENT BY DELIVERING ((YOUR SEPARATE SIGNED)) A SEPARATELY SIGNED
WRITTEN STATEMENT OF RESCISSION TO ((THE)) SELLER ((UNLESS YOU WAIVE
THIS RIGHT OF RESCISSION)). BUYER MAY, HOWEVER, WAIVE THE RIGHT TO
RESCIND AT OR PRIOR TO THE TIME BUYER ENTERS INTO A PURCHASE AND SALE
AGREEMENT.

BUYER HEREBY ACKNOWLEDGES
RECEIPT OF A COPY OF THIS ((REAL PROPERTY TRANSFER)) DISCLOSURE
STATEMENT AND ACKNOWLEDGES THAT THE DISCLOSURES MADE HEREIN ARE THOSE OF THE
SELLER ONLY, AND NOT OF ANY REAL ESTATE LICENSEE OR OTHER PARTY.

DATE
. . . . . . . BUYER
. . . . . . . . . BUYER.................

(2) The
real property transfer disclosure statement shall be for disclosure only, and
shall not be considered part of any written agreement between the buyer and
seller of residential real property. The real property transfer disclosure
statement shall be only a disclosure made by the seller, and not any real
estate licensee involved in the transaction, and shall not be construed as a warranty
of any kind by the seller or any real estate licensee involved in the
transaction.

--- END ---