BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF
WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1. RCW 49.46.010 and 1997 c
203 s 3 are each amended to read as follows:

As used in this
chapter:

(1)
"Director" means the director of labor and industries;

(2) "Wage"
means compensation due to an employee by reason of employment, payable in legal
tender of the United States or checks on banks convertible into cash on demand
at full face value, subject to such deductions, charges, or allowances as may
be permitted by rules of the director;

(3) "Employ"
includes to permit to work;

(4)
"Employer" includes any individual, partnership, association,
corporation, business trust, or any person or group of persons acting directly
or indirectly in the interest of an employer in relation to an employee;

(5) "Employee"
includes any individual employed by an employer but shall not include:

(a) Any individual (((i)))
who is employed as a hand harvest laborer and paid on a piece rate basis
in an operation which has been, and is generally and customarily recognized as
having been, paid on a piece rate basis in the region of employment((; (ii)
who commutes daily from his or her permanent residence to the farm on which he
or she is employed; and (iii) who has been employed in agriculture less than
thirteen weeks during the preceding calendar year));

(b) Any individual
employed in casual labor in or about a private home, unless performed in the
course of the employer's trade, business, or profession;

(c) Any individual
employed in a bona fide executive, administrative, or professional capacity or
in the capacity of outside salesman as those terms are defined and delimited by
rules of the director. However, those terms shall be defined and delimited by
the Washington personnel resources board pursuant to chapter 41.06 RCW;

(d) Any individual
engaged in the activities of an educational, charitable, religious, state or
local governmental body or agency, or nonprofit organization where the
employer-employee relationship does not in fact exist or where the services are
rendered to such organizations gratuitously. If the individual receives
reimbursement in lieu of compensation for normally incurred out-of-pocket
expenses or receives a nominal amount of compensation per unit of voluntary
service rendered, an employer-employee relationship is deemed not to exist for
the purpose of this section or for purposes of membership or qualification in
any state, local government or publicly supported retirement system other than
that provided under chapter 41.24 RCW;

(e) Any individual
employed full time by any state or local governmental body or agency who
provides voluntary services but only with regard to the provision of the
voluntary services. The voluntary services and any compensation therefor shall
not affect or add to qualification, entitlement or benefit rights under any
state, local government, or publicly supported retirement system other than
that provided under chapter 41.24 RCW;

(f) Any newspaper
vendor or carrier;

(g) Any carrier subject
to regulation by Part 1 of the Interstate Commerce Act;

(h) Any individual
engaged in forest protection and fire prevention activities;

(i) Any individual
employed by any charitable institution charged with child care responsibilities
engaged primarily in the development of character or citizenship or promoting
health or physical fitness or providing or sponsoring recreational opportunities
or facilities for young people or members of the armed forces of the United
States;

(j) Any individual
whose duties require that he or she reside or sleep at the place of his or her
employment or who otherwise spends a substantial portion of his or her work
time subject to call, and not engaged in the performance of active duties;

(k) Any resident,
inmate, or patient of a state, county, or municipal correctional, detention,
treatment or rehabilitative institution;

(l) Any individual who
holds a public elective or appointive office of the state, any county, city,
town, municipal corporation or quasi municipal corporation, political
subdivision, or any instrumentality thereof, or any employee of the state
legislature;

(m) All vessel
operating crews of the Washington state ferries operated by the department of
transportation;

(n) Any individual
employed as a seaman on a vessel other than an American vessel;

(6)
"Occupation" means any occupation, service, trade, business,
industry, or branch or group of industries or employment or class of employment
in which employees are gainfully employed;

(7)
"Retail or service establishment" means an establishment seventy-five
percent of whose annual dollar volume of sales of goods or services, or both,
is not for resale and is recognized as retail sales or services in the
particular industry.

--- END ---