BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF
WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1. RCW 46.12.070 and 1990 c
250 s 28 are each amended to read as follows:

Upon the destruction of
any vehicle issued a certificate of ownership under this chapter or a license
registration under chapter 46.16 RCW, the registered owner and the legal owner
shall forthwith and within fifteen days thereafter forward and surrender the
certificate to the department, or the department's agent or subagent
appointed under chapter 46.01 RCW, together with a statement of the reason
for the surrender and the date and place of destruction and the fee
specified in RCW 46.01.140 (4)(a) or (5)(b). Failure to notify the
department, or the department's agent or subagent, or the possession by
any person of any such certificate for a vehicle so destroyed, after fifteen
days following its destruction, is prima facie evidence of violation of the
provisions of this chapter and constitutes a gross misdemeanor.

Any
insurance company settling an insurance claim on a vehicle that has been issued
a certificate of ownership under this chapter or a certificate of license
registration under chapter 46.16 RCW as a total loss, less salvage value, shall
notify the department ((thereof)), or the department's agent or
subagent appointed under chapter 46.01 RCW, with the fee specified in RCW
46.01.140 (4)(a) or (5)(b) within fifteen days after the settlement of the
claim. Notification shall be provided regardless of where or in what jurisdiction
the total loss occurred.

Sec. 2. RCW 46.80.090 and 1999 c
278 s 3 are each amended to read as follows:

Within
thirty days after acquiring a vehicle, the vehicle wrecker shall furnish a
written report to the department, or its agents or subagents appointed under
RCW 46.01.140, with the fee specified in RCW 46.01.140 (4)(a) or (5)(b).
This report shall be in such form as the department shall prescribe and shall
be accompanied by evidence of ownership as determined by the department. No
vehicle wrecker may acquire a vehicle, including a vehicle from an interim
owner, without first obtaining evidence of ownership as determined by the
department. For a vehicle from an interim owner, the evidence of ownership may
not require that a title be issued in the name of the interim owner as required
by RCW 46.12.101. The vehicle wrecker shall furnish a monthly report of all
acquired vehicles. This report shall be made on forms prescribed by the
department and contain such information as the department may require. This
statement shall be signed by the vehicle wrecker or an authorized
representative and the facts therein sworn to before a notary public, or before
an officer or employee of the department designated by the director to
administer oaths or acknowledge signatures, pursuant to RCW 46.01.180.

Sec. 3. RCW 46.55.100 and 1999 c
398 s 5 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) At the time of
impoundment the registered tow truck operator providing the towing service
shall give immediate notification, by telephone or radio, to a law enforcement
agency having jurisdiction who shall maintain a log of such reports. A law
enforcement agency, or a private communication center acting on behalf of a law
enforcement agency, shall within six to twelve hours of the impoundment,
provide to a requesting operator the name and address of the legal and
registered owners of the vehicle, and the registered owner of any personal
property registered or titled with the department that is attached to or
contained in or on the impounded vehicle, the vehicle identification number,
and any other necessary, pertinent information. The initial notice of
impoundment shall be followed by a written or electronic facsimile notice
within twenty-four hours. In the case of a vehicle from another state, time
requirements of this subsection do not apply until the requesting law
enforcement agency in this state receives the information.

(2) The operator shall
immediately send an abandoned vehicle report to the department or the
department's agent or subagent appointed under RCW 46.01.140, together with the
fee prescribed in RCW 46.01.140 (4)(a) or (5)(b) for any vehicle, and for
any items of personal property registered or titled with the department, that
are in the operator's possession after the one hundred twenty hour abandonment
period. Such report need not be sent when the impoundment is pursuant to a
writ, court order, or police hold that is not a suspended license impound. The
owner notification and abandonment process shall be initiated by the registered
tow truck operator immediately following notification by a court or law
enforcement officer that the writ, court order, or police hold that is not a
suspended license impound is no longer in effect.

(3) Following the
submittal of an abandoned vehicle report, the department or the department's
agent or subagent shall provide the registered tow truck operator with
owner information within seventy-two hours, excluding Saturdays, Sundays,
and state and federal holidays.

(4) Within fourteen
days of the sale of an abandoned vehicle at public auction, the towing operator
shall send a copy of the abandoned vehicle report showing the disposition of
the abandoned vehicle and any other items of personal property registered or
titled with the department to the crime information center of the Washington
state patrol.

(5) If the operator
sends an abandoned vehicle report to the department, or the department's
agent or subagent, and ((the department finds)) they find no
owner information, an operator may proceed with an inspection of the vehicle
and any other items of personal property registered or titled with the
department to determine whether owner identification is within the vehicle.

(6) If the operator
finds no owner identification, the operator shall immediately notify the
appropriate law enforcement agency, which shall search the vehicle and any
other items of personal property registered or titled with the department for
the vehicle identification number or other appropriate identification numbers
and check the necessary records to determine the vehicle's or other property's
owners.

Sec. 4. RCW 46.01.230 and 1994 c
262 s 1 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) The department of
licensing is authorized to accept checks and money orders for payment of
drivers' licenses, certificates of ownership and registration, motor vehicle
excise taxes, gross weight fees, and other fees and taxes collected by the department,
in accordance with regulations adopted by the director. The director's
regulations shall duly provide for the public's convenience consistent with
sound business practice and shall encourage the annual renewal of vehicle
registrations by mail to the department, authorizing checks and money orders
for payment. Such regulations shall contain provisions for cancellation of any
registrations, licenses, or permits paid for by checks or money orders which
are not duly paid and for the necessary accounting procedures in such cases:
PROVIDED, That any bona fide purchaser for value of a vehicle shall not be
liable or responsible for any prior uncollected taxes and fees paid, pursuant
to this section, by a check which has subsequently been dishonored: AND
PROVIDED FURTHER, That no transfer of ownership of a vehicle may be denied to a
bona fide purchaser for value of a vehicle if there are outstanding uncollected
fees or taxes for which a predecessor paid, pursuant to this section, by check
which has subsequently been dishonored nor shall the new owner be required to
pay any fee for replacement vehicle license number plates that may be required
pursuant to RCW 46.16.270 as now or hereafter amended.

(2) It is a traffic
infraction to fail to surrender within ten days to the department or any
authorized agent of the department any certificate, license, or permit after
being notified that such certificate, license, or permit has been canceled
pursuant to this section. Notice of cancellation may be accomplished by
sending a notice by first class mail using the last known address in department
records for the holder of the certificate, license, or permit, and recording
the transmittal on an affidavit of first class mail.

(3) Whenever
registrations, licenses, or permits have been paid for by checks that have been
dishonored by nonacceptance or nonpayment, a reasonable handling fee may be
assessed for each such instrument. Notwithstanding provisions of any other
laws, county auditors, agents, and subagents, appointed or approved by the
director pursuant to RCW 46.01.140, may collect restitution, and where they
have collected restitution may retain the reasonable handling fee. The amount
of the reasonable handling fee may be set by rule by the director.

(4) In those counties
where the county auditor has been appointed an agent of the director under RCW
46.01.140, the auditor shall continue to process mail-in registration renewals
until directed otherwise by legislative authority. Subagents appointed by the
director under RCW 46.01.140 have the same authority to handle mail as the
agents until directed otherwise by legislative authority.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 5. This act takes effect
January 1, 2003.

---
END ---