BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF
WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1. RCW 7.06.010 and 1991 c
363 s 7 are each amended to read as follows:

In counties with a
population of more than one hundred fifty thousand, mandatory arbitration of
civil actions under this chapter shall be required. In counties with a
population of ((seventy thousand or more)) one hundred fifty thousand
or less, the superior court of the county, by majority vote of the judges
thereof, or the county legislative authority may authorize mandatory
arbitration of civil actions under this chapter. ((In all other counties,
the superior court of the county, by a majority vote of the judges thereof, may
authorize mandatory arbitration of civil actions under this chapter.))

Sec. 2. RCW 36.18.016 and 2001 c
146 s 2 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) Revenue collected
under this section is not subject to division under RCW 36.18.025 or 27.24.070.

(2) For the filing of a
petition for modification of a decree of dissolution or paternity, within the
same case as the original action, a fee of twenty dollars must be paid.

(3)(a) The party making
a demand for a jury of six in a civil action shall pay, at the time, a fee of
one hundred twenty-five dollars; if the demand is for a jury of twelve, a fee
of two hundred fifty dollars. If, after the party demands a jury of six and
pays the required fee, any other party to the action requests a jury of twelve,
an additional one hundred twenty-five dollar fee will be required of the party
demanding the increased number of jurors.

(b) Upon conviction in
criminal cases a jury demand charge of fifty dollars for a jury of six, or one
hundred dollars for a jury of twelve may be imposed as costs under RCW
10.46.190.

(4) For preparing,
transcribing, or certifying an instrument on file or of record in the clerk's
office, with or without seal, for the first page or portion of the first page,
a fee of two dollars, and for each additional page or portion of a page, a fee
of one dollar must be charged. For authenticating or exemplifying an
instrument, a fee of one dollar for each additional seal affixed must be
charged.

(5) For executing a
certificate, with or without a seal, a fee of two dollars must be charged.

(6) For a garnishee
defendant named in an affidavit for garnishment and for a writ of attachment, a
fee of twenty dollars must be charged.

(7) For approving a
bond, including justification on the bond, in other than civil actions and
probate proceedings, a fee of two dollars must be charged.

(8) For the issuance of
a certificate of qualification and a certified copy of letters of
administration, letters testamentary, or letters of guardianship, there must be
a fee of two dollars.

(9) For the preparation
of a passport application, the clerk may collect an execution fee as authorized
by the federal government.

(10) For clerk's
services such as processing ex parte orders, performing historical searches,
compiling statistical reports, and conducting exceptional record searches, the
clerk may collect a fee not to exceed twenty dollars per hour or portion of an
hour.

(11) For duplicated
recordings of court's proceedings there must be a fee of ten dollars for each
audio tape and twenty-five dollars for each video tape.

(12) For the filing of
oaths and affirmations under chapter 5.28 RCW, a fee of twenty dollars must be
charged.

(13) For filing a
disclaimer of interest under RCW 11.86.031(4), a fee of two dollars must be
charged.

(14) For registration
of land titles, Torrens Act, under RCW 65.12.780, a fee of five dollars must be
charged.

(15) For the issuance
of extension of judgment under RCW 6.17.020 and chapter 9.94A RCW, a fee of one
hundred ten dollars must be charged.

(16) A facilitator
surcharge of ten dollars must be charged as authorized under RCW 26.12.240.

(17) For filing a water
rights statement under RCW 90.03.180, a fee of twenty-five dollars must be
charged.

(18) A service fee of
three dollars for the first page and one dollar for each additional page must
be charged for receiving faxed documents, pursuant to Washington state rules of
court, general rule 17.

(19) For preparation of
clerk's papers under RAP 9.7, a fee of fifty cents per page must be charged.

(20) For copies and
reports produced at the local level as permitted by RCW 2.68.020 and supreme
court policy, a variable fee must be charged.

(21) Investment service
charge and earnings under RCW 36.48.090 must be charged.

(22) Costs for
nonstatutory services rendered by clerk by authority of local ordinance or
policy must be charged.

(23) For filing a
request for mandatory arbitration, a filing fee may be assessed against
the party filing a statement of arbitrability not to exceed ((one)) two
hundred twenty dollars as established by authority of local ordinance ((and
approved by a vote of the people if it is determined by a court of competent
jurisdiction that such a vote is required by chapter 1, Laws of 2000
(Initiative Measure No. 695))). This charge shall be used solely to offset
the cost of the mandatory arbitration program.

(24) For filing a
request for trial de novo of an arbitration award, a fee not to exceed two
hundred fifty dollars as established by authority of local ordinance must be
charged.

Sec. 3. RCW 7.36.250 and 1947 c
256 s 1 are each amended to read as follows:

Any person
entitled to prosecute a writ of habeas corpus who, by reason of poverty is
unable to pay the costs of such proceeding or give security therefor, may file
in the court having original jurisdiction of the proceeding an affidavit
setting forth such facts and that he or she believes himself or
herself to be entitled to the redress sought. Upon the filing of such an
affidavit the court may, if satisfied that the proceeding or appeal is
instituted or taken in good faith, order that such proceeding, including
appeal, may be prosecuted without prepayment of fees or costs or the giving of
security therefor. This section also applies to filing fees assessed under
RCW 36.18.016.

---
END ---