BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF
WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec.
1. A new section is added
to chapter 19.27 RCW to read as follows:

(1) The state building
code council shall develop and adopt a manufactured structure installation code
covering the installation of mobile and manufactured homes, factory-built
housing, and factory-built commercial structures.

(2) In developing the
code, the council shall incorporate and give deference to installation guide
documents provided by manufacturers of manufactured structures. The council
shall also review and consider existing installation guides being used by
installers in Washington state.

(3) The
code shall be intended to provide assistance to and be used by local
governments in fulfilling their obligation to inspect the installation of
manufactured structures in Washington state.

--- END ---