BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF
WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1. RCW 41.31.010 and 1998 c
340 s 1 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) Beginning
January 1, 2003, and on January 1st of odd-numbered years thereafter, the
amount of extraordinary investment gains, if any, shall be used to provide a
lump sum payment to each plan 1 retiree under chapters 41.32 and 41.40 RCW.
The department shall calculate the amount of each payment as follows:

(a) Each plan 1
retiree is awarded one point for each year of service credit and two points for
each year of retirement;

(b) The total amount
of extraordinary investment gains under RCW 41.31.020 is divided by the total
number of points awarded under (a) of this subsection;

(c) Each retiree's
individual point total is then multiplied by the single point value determined
under (b) of this subsection and that amount is the odd year additional
payment.

(2) Beginning
July 1, 1998, and on January 1st of even-numbered years thereafter, the annual
increase amount as defined in RCW 41.32.010 and 41.40.010 shall be increased by
the gain-sharing increase amount, if any. The monthly retirement allowance of
a person in receipt of the benefit provided in RCW 41.32.489 or 41.40.197 shall
immediately be adjusted to reflect any increase.

Sec. 2. RCW 41.31.030 and 1998 c
340 s 3 are each amended to read as follows:

The
legislature reserves the right to amend or repeal this chapter in the future
and no member or beneficiary has a contractual right to receive ((this))
a postretirement adjustment or lump sum payment not granted prior
to that amendment or repeal.

---
END ---