BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF
WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec.
1. The legislature finds
that:

(1) The department of
fish and wildlife issues thousands of hydraulic project approval permits each
year for hydraulic projects or work that will use, divert, obstruct, or change
the natural flow or bed of any of the salt or fresh waters of the state.

(2) The hydraulic
project approval permit program can provide important habitat protection for
salmon, steelhead, and trout stocks listed under the federal endangered species
act.

(3) Determining the
cost of processing, issuing, and implementing decisions on hydraulic project
approval permit applications and whether a funding system that fairly allocates
benefits to the applicant and to the public is desirable or possible.

(4) Since hydraulic
project approval permit authority was first granted to the department of fish
and wildlife there has been no external review and analysis of the program to
determine its effectiveness.

(5) The state fish and
wildlife commission should take a lead role in conducting such a review and
analysis of the hydraulic project approval permit program.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
2. A new section is added
to chapter 77.55 RCW to read as follows:

(1) There is hereby
created the hydraulic project approval permit program technical advisory group
as a subcommittee of the state fish and wildlife commission.

(2) The hydraulic
project approval permit program technical advisory group shall consist of
seventeen members including: One member of the commission who must serve as
chair of the group; one member designated by the secretary of transportation;
one member designated by the director of fish and wildlife; one member
designated by the director of ecology; one member designated by the
commissioner of public lands; one member representing local government
designated by the association of Washington cities and the Washington state
association of counties; one member designated by the Washington state public
ports association; one member designated by the regional fisheries enhancement
group advisory board; one member designated by the Washington state farm
bureau; one member representing marine construction, designated by the building
industry association of Washington and the associated general contractors of
Washington; one member designated by the American council of engineering
companies; one member designated by the northwest Indian fisheries commission;
one member designated by aquaculture interests; two members representing
environmental organizations; one member designated by commercial fishing
interests; and one member designated by recreational fishing interests.

(3) Representatives
from federal regulatory agencies, including the United States army corps of
engineers, the environmental protection agency, the national marine fisheries
service, and the United States fish and wildlife service must be invited to
participate in technical advisory group work.

(4) The committee may
create technical subcommittees as needed.

(5) The commission may
employ temporary staff or contract for services to provide administrative and
technical assistance to the hydraulic project approval permit program technical
advisory group.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
3. A new section is added
to chapter 77.55 RCW to read as follows:

(1) The hydraulic
project approval permit program technical advisory group must conduct a study
of the state hydraulic project approval permit program to determine:

(a) If there are clear
statutory and administrative goals for the program;

(b) Whether the
activities, projects, and physical areas covered by the program are clearly
delineated in statute;

(c) Whether there is
redundancy, duplication, or conflict between federal, state, or local
regulatory programs of similar nature;

(d) Whether the
hydraulic project approval permit program is being administered in an
economical, cost-effective manner and whether there are system efficiencies
that can be used to improve program performance in protecting fish life and
processing permits;

(e) Consistency of
hydraulic project approval permit program implementation from region to region
of the state;

(f) The effectiveness
of hydraulic project approval permit conditions and mitigation requirements in
terms of protecting fish life;

(g) The adequacy of
hydraulic project approval permit monitoring to ensure that the protection of
fish life is being achieved;

(h) If currently
available training and education programs are adequate and appropriate for
educating department personnel responsible for adopting, implementing, and
enforcing the hydraulic code and industry and other groups responsible for
complying with hydraulic program requirements;

(i) Whether the
hydraulic appeals board process and membership under RCW 77.55.170 can be modified
to improve the hydraulic appeals process; and

(j) Based on findings
from (c) through (e) of this subsection, whether existing funding sources:

(i) Are adequate for
program workload; and

(ii) Fairly distribute
program costs and benefits between the general taxpayer and program applicants.

(2) Once the hydraulic
project approval permit program technical advisory group has concluded review
of the existing program and the areas listed in subsection (1) of this section,
the group must develop and provide a report to the commission, the governor,
and the legislature that provides recommendations for administrative and
statutory changes to improve the program, and appropriate funding sources for
the program. However, projects whose sole purpose is to restore and enhance
habitat are exempt from the payment of fees. The report must also identify
outcome-based performance measures to improve the timeliness of permit
issuance, service delivery, and client satisfaction.

(3) For those
recommendations that do not receive the unanimous support of the hydraulic
project approval permit program technical advisory group, a list of options for
addressing the identified issue must be provided as part of the report.

(4) Any recommendations
of the hydraulic project approval permit program technical advisory group
concerning fees must be consistent with the direction provided in RCW
76.09.030(2) to work for the integration of the forest practices and hydraulic
permitting processes. It is the legislature's intent that no hydraulic permit
fees be charged once these two permitting processes are integrated.

(5) The
final report of the hydraulic project approval permit program technical
advisory group must be provided to the commission, the governor, and the
appropriate committees of the legislature by November 15, 2002.

---
END ---