BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF
WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1. RCW 59.20.060 and 1999 c
359 s 5 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) Any mobile home
space tenancy regardless of the term, shall be based upon a written rental
agreement, signed by the parties, which shall contain:

(a) The terms for the
payment of rent, including time and place, and any additional charges to be
paid by the tenant. Additional charges that occur less frequently than monthly
shall be itemized in a billing to the tenant;

(b) Reasonable rules
for guest parking which shall be clearly stated;

(c) The rules and
regulations of the park;

(d) The name and address
of the person who is the landlord, and if such person does not reside in the
state there shall also be designated by name and address a person who resides
in the county where the mobile home park is located who is authorized to act as
agent for the purposes of service of notices and process. If no designation is
made of a person to act as agent, then the person to whom rental payments are
to be made shall be considered the agent;

(e) The name and
address of any party who has a secured interest in the mobile home,
manufactured home, or park model;

(f) A forwarding
address of the tenant or the name and address of a person who would likely know
the whereabouts of the tenant in the event of an emergency or an abandonment of
the mobile home, manufactured home, or park model;

(g)(i) A covenant by
the landlord that, except for acts or events beyond the control of the
landlord, the mobile home park will not be converted to a land use that will
prevent the space that is the subject of the lease from continuing to be used
for its intended use for a period of three years after the beginning of the
term of the rental agreement;

(ii) A rental agreement
may, in the alternative, contain a statement that the park may be sold or
otherwise transferred at any time with the result that subsequent owners may
close the mobile home park, or that the landlord may close the park at any time
after the required notice. The covenant or statement required by this
subsection must appear in print that is larger than the other text of the lease
and must be set off by means of a box, blank space, or comparable visual
device;

The requirements of
this subsection shall apply to tenancies initiated after April 28, 1989.

(h) The terms and
conditions under which any deposit or portion thereof may be withheld by the
landlord upon termination of the rental agreement if any moneys are paid to the
landlord by the tenant as a deposit or as security for performance of the
tenant's obligations in a rental agreement;

(i) A listing of the
utilities, services, and facilities which will be available to the tenant
during the tenancy and the nature of the fees, if any, to be charged;

(j) A description of
the boundaries of a mobile home space sufficient to inform the tenant of the
exact location of the tenant's space in relation to other tenants' spaces;

(k) A statement of the
current zoning of the land on which the mobile home park is located; and

(l) A statement of the
expiration date of any conditional use, temporary use, or other land use permit
subject to a fixed expiration date that is necessary for the continued use of
the land as a mobile home park.

(2) Any rental
agreement executed between the landlord and tenant shall not contain any
provision:

(a) Which allows the
landlord to charge a fee for guest parking unless a violation of the rules for
guest parking occurs: PROVIDED, That a fee may be charged for guest parking
which covers an extended period of time as defined in the rental agreement;

(b) Which authorizes
the towing or impounding of a vehicle except upon notice to the owner thereof
or the tenant whose guest is the owner of the vehicle;

(c) Which allows the
landlord to alter the due date for rent payment or increase the rent: (i)
During the term of the rental agreement if the term is less than one year, or
(ii) more frequently than annually if the term is for one year or more:
PROVIDED, That a rental agreement may include an escalation clause for a pro
rata share of any increase in the mobile home park's real property taxes or utility
assessments or charges, over the base taxes or utility assessments or charges
of the year in which the rental agreement took effect, if the clause also
provides for a pro rata reduction in rent or other charges in the event of a
reduction in real property taxes or utility assessments or charges, below the
base year: PROVIDED FURTHER, That a rental agreement for a term exceeding one
year may provide for annual increases in rent in specified amounts or by a
formula specified in such agreement;

(d) By which the tenant
agrees to waive or forego rights or remedies under this chapter;

(e) Allowing the
landlord to charge an "entrance fee" or an "exit fee":
PROVIDED, That a landlord may charge an "entrance fee" or an
"exit fee" as part of a written contract to provide care in a nursing
home, as defined in chapter 18.51 RCW, or in a continuing care retirement
community, as defined in RCW 70.38.025, or in a boarding home as defined in
chapter 18.20 RCW;

(f) Which allows the
landlord to charge a fee for guests: PROVIDED, That a landlord may establish
rules charging for guests who remain on the premises for more than fifteen days
in any sixty-day period;

(g) By which the tenant
agrees to waive or forego homestead rights provided by chapter 6.13 RCW. This
subsection shall not prohibit such waiver after a default in rent so long as
such waiver is in writing signed by the husband and wife or by an unmarried
claimant and in consideration of the landlord's agreement not to terminate the
tenancy for a period of time specified in the waiver if the landlord would be
otherwise entitled to terminate the tenancy under this chapter; or

(h) By
which, at the time the rental agreement is entered into, the landlord and tenant
agree to the selection of a particular arbitrator.

--- END ---