BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF
WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec.
1. A new section is added
to chapter 43.105 RCW to read as follows:

INTENT. The
legislature finds that major state information technology projects require
additional oversight and review, along with a new funding approach. The
legislature finds that public funds are used most efficiently when major state
information projects are funded using a competitive approach that relies on
incremental expenditures from a pooled fund to reward efficient and timely
completion of projects. Incremental expenditures and increased, expert
oversight of expenditures will promote sound agency planning, will ensure wise
use of public funds, and will avoid delays that would otherwise result in
increased costs to taxpayers and delayed implementation of state technology
services. Such an approach will also permit prompt revision of expenditure
plans to allow redeployment of public moneys to the projects that can be
completed effectively. Additionally, the legislature finds that the funding
system for information technology projects should encourage agencies to invest
in technology projects that will result in future savings to the state.

Sec. 2. RCW 43.105.020 and 1999
c 285 s 1 and 1999 c 80 s 1 are each reenacted and amended to read as follows:

DEFINITIONS. As used
in this chapter, unless the context indicates otherwise, the following
definitions shall apply:

(1)
"Department" means the department of information services;

(2) "Board"
means the information services board;

(3) "Local
governments" includes all municipal and quasi municipal corporations and
political subdivisions, and all agencies of such corporations and subdivisions
authorized to contract separately;

(4)
"Director" means the director of the department;

(5) "Purchased
services" means services provided by a vendor to accomplish routine,
continuing, and necessary functions. This term includes, but is not limited
to, services acquired for equipment maintenance and repair, operation of a
physical plant, security, computer hardware and software installation and
maintenance, data entry, keypunch services, programming services, and computer
time-sharing;

(6) "Backbone
network" means the shared high-density portions of the state's
telecommunications transmission facilities. It includes specially conditioned
high-speed communications carrier lines, multiplexors, switches associated with
such communications lines, and any equipment and software components necessary
for management and control of the backbone network;

(7)
"Telecommunications" means the transmission of information by wire,
radio, optical cable, electromagnetic, or other means;

(8) "Information
processing" means the electronic capture, collection, storage,
manipulation, transmission, retrieval, and presentation of information in the
form of data, text, voice, or image and includes telecommunications and office
automation functions;

(9) "Information
services" means data processing, telecommunications, and office
automation;

(10)
"Equipment" means the machines, devices, and transmission facilities
used in information processing, such as computers, word processors, terminals,
telephones, and cables;

(11) "Information
technology portfolio" or "portfolio" means a strategic
management process documenting relationships between agency missions and
information technology investments;

(12)
"Oversight" means a process of comprehensive risk analysis and
management designed to ensure optimum use of information technology resources;

(13) "Proprietary
software" means that software offered for sale or license;

(14) "Video
telecommunications" means the electronic interconnection of two or more
sites for the purpose of transmitting and/or receiving visual and associated
audio information. Video telecommunications shall not include existing public
television broadcast stations as currently designated by the department of
community, trade, and economic development under chapter 43.330 RCW;

(15) "K-20
educational network board" or "K-20 board" means the K-20
educational network board created in RCW 43.105.800;

(16) "K-20 network
technical steering committee" or "committee" means the K-20
network technical steering committee created in RCW 43.105.810;

(17) "K-20
network" means the network established in RCW 43.105.820;

(18) "Educational
sectors" means those institutions of higher education, school districts,
and educational service districts that use the network for distance education,
data transmission, and other uses permitted by the K-20 board;

(19)
"Committee" means the funding and oversight committee of the board
created in section 3 of this act;

(20) "Major
project" means a state information technology project, the total cost of
which is projected to exceed the lesser of either five million dollars or five
percent of the total budgeted funding for the agency involved;

(21)
"Fund" means the information technology pool fund created in section
12 of this act.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
3. A new section is added
to chapter 43.105 RCW to read as follows:

FUNDING AND OVERSIGHT
COMMITTEE. (1) The funding and oversight committee of the board is created.
Members of the funding and oversight committee are the two board members
appointed by the governor to represent the private sector, the two board
members who represent the house of representatives, the two board members who
represent the senate, and the director of financial management, or the
director's designee.

(2) The funding and
oversight committee has the following powers and duties:

(a) In consultation
with the office of financial management, the committee shall develop and
approve an expenditure plan for major projects to be funded from the
information technology pool fund created in section 12 of this act.

(b) In consultation
with the office of financial management, the committee shall monitor and
oversee expenditures from the information technology pool fund in order to
ensure compliance with expenditure plans and performance standards as described
in section 4 of this act.

(c) The committee may
authorize expenditures from the information technology pool fund pursuant to
expenditure plans.

(d) The committee may
review proposals, establish repayment schedules, and authorize expenditures
from the information technology pool fund under the agency technology
initiative program created in section 5 of this act.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
4. A new section is added
to chapter 43.105 RCW to read as follows:

INCREMENTAL FUNDING AND
OVERSIGHT OF MAJOR TECHNOLOGY PROJECTS. Major projects shall be funded from
the information technology pool fund on an incremental basis and shall be
overseen by the committee as set forth in this section.

(1) The committee may
authorize expenditures from the fund for major projects after the legislature
has authorized funding for the project. The legislature may authorize funding
for major projects by:

(a) In the omnibus
operating appropriations act, providing an appropriation to be deposited in the
fund for a particular project; or

(b) In the omnibus
operating appropriations act, including the project in a prioritized list of
projects to be funded by the committee according to available moneys in the
fund.

(2) After the
legislature directs that a major project be funded from the information
technology pool fund, the committee, in consultation with the agency and the
office of financial management, shall prepare an expenditure and oversight plan
for the project.

The expenditure and
oversight plan shall:

(a) Include specific
goals, progress schedules, and performance standards;

(b) Require incremental
funding of a project on a phase-by-phase basis whereby funds for a given phase
of a project may be released only when the committee determines that the
previous phase has been or will be satisfactorily completed;

(c) Reflect the
portfolio-based technology standards and policies applicable to the agency
under RCW 43.105.190;

(d) Consider the
feasibility study, project management plan, and quality assurance plan
developed by the agency under section 11 of this act. However, the oversight
and expenditure plan need not follow the feasibility study, project management
plan, or quality assurance plan if the committee concludes that different
requirements are necessary; and

(e) Incorporate acceptance
testing of products to assure that products perform satisfactorily before they
are accepted and incremental or final payment is made.

(3) After approving the
expenditure and oversight plan, the committee shall authorize expenditures for
major projects from the information technology pool fund in accordance with the
expenditure and oversight plan for each project.

(4) On at least a
quarterly basis, the committee shall review agency progress for each project
under the expenditure and oversight plan to determine whether incremental funds
for the following phases of the project should be released. Depending on the
progress made by individual projects, the committee, in consultation with the
office of financial management, may reallocate funding among approved projects,
or it may approve new projects, either from the priority list under subsection
(1)(b) of this section or under the agency technology initiative program in
section 5 of this act. However, when reallocating funding from the legislative
priority list under subsection (1)(b) of this section, the committee shall give
first consideration to other projects on that priority list.

(5) If a project is not
meeting, or expected to meet, performance standards or schedules as provided in
the project's expenditure and oversight plan, the committee may:

(a) Assess monetary
penalties against the agency in an amount to be determined by the committee; or

(b) Terminate the
project. Prior to terminating a project, the committee shall consult with the
office of financial management and shall notify the appropriate fiscal
committees of the senate and the house of representatives.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
5. A new section is added
to chapter 43.105 RCW to read as follows:

AGENCY TECHNOLOGY
INITIATIVE PROGRAM. In addition to funding major information projects from the
information technology pool fund as set forth in section 4 of this act, the
committee may also authorize expenditures from the fund under the agency
technology initiative program established in this section. The agency
technology initiative program is created and it is intended to encourage
agencies to make near-term technology investments that will result in future
savings to the agency.

(1) An agency may apply
to the committee for funding from the fund for a technology project that the
agency can demonstrate will result in future savings to the agency.

(2) If the committee
concludes that funding an agency's proposed information technology project will
result in future savings to the agency, the committee may authorize funding of
a loan for the project from unexpended moneys in the information technology
pool fund. In considering applications, the committee shall give priority to
applications that will improve customer service while reducing future agency
costs.

(3) Prior to
authorizing release of the loan funding from the fund, the committee and the
agency, in consultation with the board and the office of financial management,
shall agree to a repayment schedule under which the agency will repay the
amount of the loan, or another agreed-upon amount, to the fund from the
agency's current or future appropriations. To permit the agency's loan
payments to be funded wholly from future savings achieved by the agency as a
result of the project, the repayment schedule set by the committee shall
reflect the timing and amount of agency savings expected to result from the
project.

Sec. 6. RCW 43.105.095 and 1999
c 80 s 3 are each amended to read as follows:

COMMITTEE INCLUSION IN
POLICY DEVELOPMENT. (1) Under the direction of the board, the department shall
develop policies and procedures to implement a management and oversight
structure based on the use of information technology portfolios.

(2) These policies and
procedures shall support and conform to:

(a) The state strategic
information technology plan developed under RCW 43.105.160(1) and 43.105.172;
((and))

(b) Technology
standards established by the board; and

(c) Oversight and
expenditure plans established by the committee.

Sec. 7. RCW 43.105.105 and 1999
c 80 s 4 are each amended to read as follows:

AGENCY TECHNOLOGY
PORTFOLIOS. An agency information technology portfolio shall serve as the
basis for making information technology decisions and plans including:

(1) System
refurbishment, acquisitions, and development efforts;

(2) Setting goals and
objectives for using information technology;

(3) Assessments of
information processing performance, resources, and capabilities;

(4) Ensuring the
appropriate transfer of technological expertise for the operation of new
systems developed using external resources; ((and))

(5) Progress toward
providing electronic access to public information; and

(6) Establishment of
expenditure and oversight plans for projects funded from the information
technology pool fund under sections 4 and 5 of this act.

Sec. 8. RCW 43.105.170 and 1999
c 80 s 10 are each amended to read as follows:

TECHNOLOGY PORTFOLIOS.
(1) Each agency shall develop an information technology portfolio consistent
with RCW ((43.105.095)) 43.105.172. The superintendent of public
instruction shall develop its portfolio in conjunction with educational service
districts and statewide or regional providers of K-12 education information
technology services.

(2) Agency portfolios
shall include, but not be limited to, the following:

(a) A baseline
assessment of the agency's information technology resources and capabilities
that will serve as the benchmark for subsequent planning and performance
measures;

(b) A statement of the
agency's mission, goals, and objectives for information technology, including
goals and objectives for achieving electronic access to agency records,
information, and services;

(c) An explanation of
how the agency's mission, goals, and objectives for information technology
support and conform to the state strategic information technology plan
developed under RCW 43.105.160;

(d) An implementation
strategy to provide electronic access to public records and information. This
implementation strategy must be assembled to include:

(i) Compliance with
Title 40 RCW;

(ii) Adequate public
notice and opportunity for comment;

(iii) Consideration of
a variety of electronic technologies, including those that help transcend
geographic locations, standard business hours, economic conditions of users,
and disabilities;

(iv) Methods to educate
both state employees and the public in the effective use of access
technologies;

(e) Projects and
resources required to meet the objectives of the portfolio; ((and))

(f) Where feasible,
estimated schedules and funding required to implement identified projects;
and

(g) An explanation
linking the agency's technology mission, goals, and objectives to any oversight
and expenditure plan adopted by the committee for the agency's major projects.

(3) Portfolios
developed under subsection (1) of this section shall be submitted to the
department for review and forwarded along with the department's recommendations
to the board for review and approval. The board may reject, require
modification to, or approve portfolios as deemed appropriate by the board.
Portfolios submitted under this subsection shall be updated and submitted for
review and approval as necessary.

(4) Each agency shall
prepare and submit to the department a biennial performance report that
evaluates progress toward the objectives articulated in its information
technology portfolio. The superintendent of public instruction shall develop
its portfolio in conjunction with educational service districts and statewide
or regional providers of K-12 education information technology services. The
report shall include:

(a) An evaluation of
the agency's performance relating to information technology;

(b) An assessment of
progress made toward implementing the agency information technology portfolio;

(c) Progress toward
electronic access to public information and enabling citizens to have two-way
interaction for obtaining information and services from agencies; and

(d) An inventory of
agency information services, equipment, and proprietary software.

(5) The department,
with the approval of the board, shall establish standards, elements, form, and
format for plans and reports developed under this section.

(6) Agency activities
to increase electronic access to public records and information, as required by
this section, must be implemented within available resources and existing
agency planning processes.

(7) The board may
exempt any agency from any or all of the requirements of this section.

Sec. 9. RCW 43.105.180 and 1999
c 80 s 11 are each amended to read as follows:

EVALUATION OF BUDGET
REQUESTS. Upon request of the office of financial management, the department and
the committee shall evaluate agency budget requests for major information
technology projects identified under RCW 43.105.190, including those proposed
by the superintendent of public instruction, in conjunction with educational
service districts, or statewide or regional providers of K-12 education
information technology services. The department shall submit recommendations
for funding all or part of such requests to the office of financial management.

The department, with
the advice and approval of the office of financial management and in
consultation with the committee, shall establish criteria, consistent with
portfolio-based information technology management, for the evaluation of agency
budget requests under this section. These budget requests shall be made in the
context of an agency's information technology portfolio; technology initiatives
underlying budget requests are subject to board review. Criteria shall
include, but not be limited to: Feasibility of the proposed projects,
consistency with the state strategic information technology plan, consistency
with information technology portfolios, appropriate provision for public
electronic access to information and services, costs, and benefits, and for
major projects, information that will be needed to develop the expenditure and
oversight plan required under section 4 of this act.

Sec. 10. RCW 43.105.190 and 1999
c 80 s 12 are each amended to read as follows:

STANDARDS AND
POLICIES. (1) The department, with the approval of the board and the
committee, shall establish standards and policies governing the planning,
implementation, and evaluation of major information technology projects,
including those proposed by the superintendent of public instruction, in
conjunction with educational service districts, or statewide or regional
providers of K-12 education information technology services. In addition to
the requirements of this section, major projects are subject to the oversight
and expenditure plan requirements of section 4 of this act. The standards
and policies shall:

(a) Establish criteria
to identify projects which are subject to this section. Such criteria shall
include, but not be limited to, significant anticipated cost, complexity, or
statewide significance of the project; and

(b) Establish a model
process and procedures which agencies shall follow in developing and
implementing projects within their information technology portfolios. Agencies
may propose, for approval by the department, a process and procedures unique to
the agency. The department may accept or require modification of such agency
proposals or the department may reject such agency proposals and require use of
the model process and procedures established under this subsection. Any
process and procedures developed under this subsection shall require (i)
distinct and identifiable phases upon which funding may be based, (ii) user
validation of products through system demonstrations and testing of prototypes
and deliverables, and (iii) other elements identified by the board.

((The director may
terminate a major project if the director determines that the project is not
meeting or is not expected to meet anticipated performance standards.

(2) The office of
financial management shall establish policies and standards consistent with
portfolio-based information technology management to govern the funding of
projects developed under this section. The policies and standards shall
provide for:

(a) Funding of a
project under terms and conditions mutually agreed to by the director, the
director of financial management, and the head of the agency proposing the
project. However, the office of financial management may require incremental
funding of a project on a phase-by-phase basis whereby funds for a given phase
of a project may be released only when the office of financial management
determines, with the advice of the department, that the previous phase is
satisfactorily completed;

(b) Acceptance
testing of products to assure that products perform satisfactorily before they
are accepted and final payment is made; and

(c) Other elements
deemed necessary by the office of financial management.

(3))) (2) The department shall evaluate
projects based on the demonstrated business needs and benefits; cost;
technology scope and feasibility; impact on the agency's information technology
portfolio and on the statewide infrastructure; and final project implementation
plan based upon available funding.

Copies of project
evaluations conducted under this subsection shall be submitted to the office of
financial management and the chairs, ranking minority members, and staff
coordinators of the appropriations committees of the senate and house of
representatives.

If there are projects
that receive funding from a transportation fund or account, copies of those
projects' evaluations conducted under this subsection must be submitted, during
the legislative session, to the chairs and ranking minority members of the
transportation committees of the senate and the house of representatives.
During the legislative interim, the project evaluations must be submitted to
the legislative transportation committee.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
11. A new section is added
to chapter 43.105 RCW to read as follows:

AGENCY PLANNING. (1)
Agency planning and decisions concerning information technology shall be made
in the context of its information technology portfolio so that: Technology
efforts are linked to agency objectives and business plans; the impact of new investments
on existing infrastructure and business functions are assessed and understood
before implementation; and agency activities are consistent with the
development of an integrated, nonduplicative statewide infrastructure.

(2) Agencies shall use
their information technology portfolios in making decisions on matters related
to the following:

(a) System
refurbishment, acquisitions, and development efforts;

(b) Setting goals and
objectives for using information technology in meeting legislatively mandated
missions and business needs;

(c) Assessment of
overall information processing performance, resources, and capabilities;

(d) Ensuring
appropriate transfer of technological expertise for the operation of any new
systems developed using external resources; and

(e) Progress toward
enabling electronic access to public information.

(3) Each project will
be planned and designed to take optimal advantage of internet technologies and
protocols. Agencies shall ensure that the project is in compliance with the
architecture, infrastructure, principles, policies, and standards of digital
government as maintained by the board.

(4) The agency shall
produce a feasibility study for information technology projects at the
direction of the board and in accordance with published department policies and
guidelines. At a minimum, these studies shall include a statement of: (a) The
purpose or impetus for change; (b) the business value to the agency, including
an examination and evaluation of benefits, advantages, and cost; (c) a
comprehensive risk assessment based on the proposed project's impact on both
citizens and state operations, its visibility, and the consequences of doing
nothing; (d) the impact on agency and statewide information infrastructure; and
(e) the impact of the proposed enhancements to an agency's information
technology capabilities on meeting service delivery demands.

(5) The agency shall
produce a comprehensive management plan for each project. The plan or plans
shall address all factors critical to successful completion of each project. A
plan shall include, but is not limited to, the following elements: A
description of the problem or opportunity that the information technology
project is intended to address; a statement of project objectives and assumptions;
a definition and schedule of phases, tasks, and activities to be accomplished;
and the estimated cost of each phase. The planning for the phased approach
shall be such that the business case justification for a project needs to
demonstrate how the project recovers cost or adds measurable value or positive
cost benefit to the agency's business functions within each development cycle.

(6) The agency shall
produce quality assurance plans for information technology projects.
Consistent with the direction of the board and the published policies and
guidelines of the department, the quality assurance plan shall address all
factors critical to successful completion of the project and successful
integration with the agency and state information technology infrastructure.
At a minimum, quality assurance plans shall provide time and budget benchmarks
against which project progress can be measured, a specification of quality
assurance responsibilities, and a statement of reporting requirements. The quality
assurance plans shall set out the functionality requirements for each phase of
a project.

(7) A copy of each
feasibility study, project management plan, and quality assurance plan shall be
provided to the department, the committee, the office of financial management,
and legislative fiscal committees.

(8) For major projects,
the feasibility study, project management plan, and quality assurance plan
shall be considered by the committee when the committee develops its oversight
and expenditure plan under section 4 of this act.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
12. A new section is added
to chapter 43.105 RCW to read as follows:

INFORMATION TECHNOLOGY
POOL FUND CREATED. The information technology pool fund is created in the
custody of the state treasurer. All appropriations provided for deposit in the
information technology pool fund and all repayments received under the agency
technology initiative program established in section 5 of this act must be
deposited in the information technology pool fund. All moneys appropriated to
the fund shall not lapse upon the close of the fiscal biennium and shall remain
available for expenditure without an additional appropriation. Only the
committee may authorize expenditures from the account. An appropriation is not
required for expenditure, but the fund is subject to allotment procedures under
chapter 43.88 RCW.

Sec. 13. RCW 43.79A.040 and 2001
c 201 s 4 and 2001 c 184 s 4 are each reenacted and amended to read as follows:

INFORMATION TECHNOLOGY
POOL FUND RETAINS ITS OWN INTEREST EARNINGS. (1) Money in the treasurer's
trust fund may be deposited, invested, and reinvested by the state treasurer in
accordance with RCW 43.84.080 in the same manner and to the same extent as if
the money were in the state treasury.

(2) All income received
from investment of the treasurer's trust fund shall be set aside in an account
in the treasury trust fund to be known as the investment income account.

(3) The investment
income account may be utilized for the payment of purchased banking services on
behalf of treasurer's trust funds including, but not limited to, depository,
safekeeping, and disbursement functions for the state treasurer or affected
state agencies. The investment income account is subject in all respects to
chapter 43.88 RCW, but no appropriation is required for payments to financial
institutions. Payments shall occur prior to distribution of earnings set forth
in subsection (4) of this section.

(4)(a) Monthly, the
state treasurer shall distribute the earnings credited to the investment income
account to the state general fund except under (b) and (c) of this subsection.

(b) The following
accounts and funds shall receive their proportionate share of earnings based
upon each account's or fund's average daily balance for the period: The
college savings program account, the Washington advanced college tuition
payment program account, the agricultural local fund, the American Indian
scholarship endowment fund, the basic health plan self-insurance reserve
account, the Washington international exchange scholarship endowment fund, the
developmental disabilities endowment trust fund, the energy account, the fair
fund, the game farm alternative account, the grain inspection revolving fund, the
information technology pool fund, the juvenile accountability incentive
account, the rural rehabilitation account, the stadium and exhibition center
account, the youth athletic facility account, the self-insurance revolving
fund, the sulfur dioxide abatement account, and the children's trust fund.
However, the earnings to be distributed shall first be reduced by the
allocation to the state treasurer's service fund pursuant to RCW 43.08.190.

(c) The following
accounts and funds shall receive eighty percent of their proportionate share of
earnings based upon each account's or fund's average daily balance for the
period: The advanced right of way revolving fund, the advanced environmental
mitigation revolving account, the city and county advance right-of-way
revolving fund, the federal narcotics asset forfeitures account, the high
occupancy vehicle account, the local rail service assistance account, and the
miscellaneous transportation programs account.

(5) In conformance with
Article II, section 37 of the state Constitution, no trust accounts or funds
shall be allocated earnings without the specific affirmative directive of this
section.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
14. CAPTIONS. Captions used
in this act are not any part of the law.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 15. EFFECTIVE DATE. This act
takes effect July 1, 2003.

---
END ---