BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF
WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec.
1. A new section is added
to chapter 43.20A RCW to read as follows:

(1) The secretary will
designate a person within each of the department's administrative regions to
serve as a liaison for community-based and faith-based social services
organizations. The liaison will be available to such organizations to:

(a) Provide information
to community-based and faith-based social services organizations that relates
to opportunities for the organizations to cooperate with the department in
providing community services throughout the state;

(b) Identify areas of
need that are not currently being met in the state in which community-based and
faith-based social services organizations may provide needed services;

(c) Coordinate efforts
to promote involvement of community-based and faith-based social services
organizations to provide community services throughout the state.

(2) The
department must achieve the purposes of this section through existing
resources.

--- END ---