BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF
WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec.
1. A new section is added
to chapter 48.18 RCW to read as follows:

(1) For the purposes of
this section:

(a) "Credit
history" means any written, oral, or other communication of any
information by a consumer reporting agency bearing on a consumer's credit
worthiness, credit standing, or credit capacity, that is used, or expected to
be used, or collected in whole or in part for consideration as a factor in
establishing personal insurance premiums or eligibility for coverage.

(b) "Personal
insurance" means property and casualty insurance to be used primarily for
personal, family, or household purposes, such as homeowner and private
passenger auto insurance.

(c) "Insurance
score" means a number or rating that is derived from an algorithm,
computer application, model, or other process that is based in whole or in part
on credit history.

(2) A person's credit
history or insurance score shall not be a factor considered by an insurer in
any decision to underwrite, deny, cancel, or refuse to renew a policy of
personal insurance.

(3) The commissioner
may adopt rules as necessary to implement this section.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
2. A new section is added
to chapter 48.19 RCW to read as follows:

(1) For the purposes of
this section:

(a) "Credit
history" means any written, oral, or other communication of any
information by a consumer reporting agency bearing on a consumer's credit
worthiness, credit standing, or credit capacity, that is used, or expected to
be used, or collected in whole or in part for consideration as a factor in
establishing personal insurance premiums or eligibility for coverage.

(b) "Personal
insurance" means property and casualty insurance to be used primarily for
personal, family, or household purposes, such as homeowner and private
passenger auto insurance.

(c) "Insurance
score" means a number or rating that is derived from an algorithm,
computer application, model, or other process that is based in whole or in part
on credit history.

(2) A person's credit
history or insurance score shall not be a factor considered by an insurer in
the setting or adjustment of premium rates for personal insurance.

(3) The commissioner
may adopt rules as necessary to implement this section.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 3. This act takes effect
July 1, 2002.

---
END ---