BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF
WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1. RCW 84.33.145 and 2001 c
249 s 4 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) If no later than ((thirty))
sixty days after removal of designation the owner applies for
classification under RCW 84.34.020 (1), (2), or (3), then the designated forest
land shall not be considered removed from designation for purposes of the
compensating tax under RCW 84.33.140 until the application for current use
classification under chapter 84.34 RCW is denied or the property is removed
from classification under RCW 84.34.108. Upon removal of classification under
RCW 84.34.108, the amount of compensating tax due under this chapter shall be
equal to:

(a) The difference, if
any, between the amount of tax last levied on the land as designated forest
land and an amount equal to the new assessed valuation of the land when removed
from classification under RCW 84.34.108 multiplied by the dollar rate of the
last levy extended against the land, multiplied by

(b) A number equal to:

(i) The number of years
the land was designated under this chapter, if the total number of years the
land was designated under this chapter and classified under chapter 84.34 RCW
is less than ten; or

(ii) Ten minus the
number of years the land was classified under chapter 84.34 RCW, if the total
number of years the land was designated under this chapter and classified under
chapter 84.34 RCW is at least ten.

(2) Nothing in this
section authorizes the continued designation under this chapter or defers or
reduces the compensating tax imposed upon forest land not transferred to
classification under subsection (1) of this section which does not meet the
definition of forest land under RCW 84.33.035. Nothing in this section affects
the additional tax imposed under RCW 84.34.108.

(3) In a
county with a population of more than one million inhabitants, no amount of
compensating tax is due under this section if the removal from classification
under RCW 84.34.108 results from a transfer of property described in RCW
84.34.108(6).

--- END ---