BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF
WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec.
1. A new section is added
to chapter 74.08 RCW to read as follows:

(1)(a) Any person
receiving public assistance is prohibited from using electronic benefit cards:

(i) For the purpose of
participating in any of the activities authorized under chapter 9.46 RCW;

(ii) For the purpose of
parimutuel wagering authorized under chapter 67.16 RCW; or

(iii) To purchase
lottery tickets or shares authorized under chapter 67.70 RCW.

(b) A person violating
this subsection for the first time commits a class 4 civil infraction. A
person violating this subsection for the second and subsequent times commits a
class 3 civil infraction.

(2) The court shall
notify the department of commissions of civil infractions under this section.

(3) The department
shall assign a protective payee to the person receiving public assistance who
commits a civil infraction under this section.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
2. A new section is added
to chapter 9.46 RCW to read as follows:

(1)(a) Any licensee
authorized under this chapter is prohibited from allowing the use of public
assistance electronic benefit cards for the purpose of participating in any of
the activities authorized under this chapter.

(b) A person violating
this subsection is guilty of a misdemeanor.

(2) The court shall
notify the commission of convictions under this section.

(3) The commission
shall impose fines or penalties, or both fines and penalties, on the licensee,
up to and including revocation of the license.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
3. A new section is added
to chapter 9.46 RCW to read as follows:

The commission shall
consider the provisions of section 2 of this act as elements to be negotiated
with federally recognized Indian tribes as provided in RCW 9.46.360.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
4. A new section is added
to chapter 67.16 RCW to read as follows:

(1)(a) Any licensee
authorized under this chapter is prohibited from allowing the use of public
assistance electronic benefit cards for the purpose of parimutuel wagering
authorized under this chapter.

(b) A person violating
this subsection is guilty of a misdemeanor.

(2) The court shall
notify the commission of convictions under this section.

(3) The commission
shall impose fines or penalties, or both fines and penalties, on the licensee,
up to and including revocation of the license.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
5. A new section is added
to chapter 67.70 RCW to read as follows:

(1)(a) Any licensee
authorized under this chapter is prohibited from allowing the use of public
assistance electronic benefit cards to purchase lottery tickets or shares
authorized under this chapter.

(b) A person violating
this section is guilty of a misdemeanor.

(2) The court shall
notify the commission of convictions under this section.

(3) The commission
shall impose fines or penalties, or both fines and penalties, on the licensee,
up to and including revocation of the license.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
6. A new section is added
to chapter 74.08 RCW to read as follows:

The
department shall notify public assistance recipients of the prohibitions
created in section 1 of this act when issuing the electronic benefit transfer
cards. Current public assistance recipients shall also be notified, within
existing resources.

---
END ---