BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF
WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec.
1. (1) The department of
social and health services shall review all legislatively imposed requirements
for the department to submit reports to the legislature and recommend the
continuance or elimination of the required reports. The department shall
develop criteria to assess the required reports. The criteria shall include,
but are not limited to, the cost of preparation and the relevance to departmental
needs for management information. The department shall submit a report to the
children and family services committee of the legislature, or its successor
committee, on the criteria, the review process, and the recommendations by
December 1, 2002.

(2) This
section expires December 31, 2002.

---
END ---