BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF
WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1. RCW 43.30.040 and 1986 c
227 s 1 are each amended to read as follows:

The board shall consist
of ((six)) nine members: The governor or the governor's
designee, the superintendent of public instruction or the superintendent's
designee, the commissioner of public lands, the dean of the college of
forest resources of the University of Washington, the dean of the college of
agriculture of Washington State University, the secretary of state or the
secretary's designee, one member of the general public, one representative of a
water district that contains state trust land within its watershed, and a
representative of those counties that contain state forest lands acquired or
transferred under chapter 76.12 RCW.

The member of the
general public shall be nominated from regional or statewide hunting, fishing,
recreation, or conservation groups and appointed by the governor to represent
the public interests. The member shall serve a term of four years. The
initial term shall begin on October 1, 2002.

The representative
of a water district shall be nominated by water districts that contain trust
lands within their watersheds and shall be appointed by the governor. The
representative shall be an elected member of a water district authority who
shall serve a term of four years unless the representative leaves office for
any reason. The initial term shall begin on October 1, 2002.

The county
representative shall be selected by the legislative authorities of those
counties that contain state forest lands acquired or transferred under chapter
76.12 RCW. In the selection of the county representative, each participating
county shall have one vote. The Washington state association of counties shall
conduct a meeting for the purpose of making the selection and shall notify the
board of the selection. The county representative shall be a duly elected
member of a county legislative authority who shall serve a term of four years
unless the representative ((should)) leaves office for any
reason. The initial term shall begin on July 1, 1986.

--- END ---