BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF
WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1. RCW 29.27.066 and 2000 c
197 s 12 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) Except as provided
to the contrary in RCW 82.14.036, 82.46.021, or 82.80.090, the ballot title of
any referendum filed on an enactment or portion of an enactment of a local
government and any other question submitted to the voters of a local government
consists of three elements: (a) An identification of the enacting legislative
body and a statement of the subject matter; (b) a concise description of the
measure, including a comparison of the ballot measure's financial impact, if
any, in both monetary and percentage change terms; and (c) a question. The
ballot title must conform with the requirements and be displayed substantially
as provided under RCW 29.79.035, except that the concise description must not
exceed seventy-five words. If the local governmental unit is a city or a town,
the concise statement shall be prepared by the city or town attorney. If the
local governmental unit is a county, the concise statement shall be prepared by
the prosecuting attorney of the county. If the unit is a unit of local
government other than a city, town, or county, the concise statement shall be
prepared by the prosecuting attorney of the county within which the majority
area of the unit is located.

(2) A referendum
measure on the enactment of a unit of local government shall be advertised in
the manner provided for nominees for elective office.

(3)
Subsection (1) of this section does not apply if another provision of law
specifies the ballot title for a specific type of ballot question or
proposition.

--- END ---