BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF
WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec.
1. A new section is added
to chapter 64.34 RCW to read as follows:

If an agreement between
a declarant and purchaser provides the declarant with a right to notice of and
the right to cure conditions that are covered by any express or implied
warranty of quality, the commencement of any proceeding based on an alleged
breach of a warranty of quality shall be subject to the purchaser's or
association's compliance with a reasonable notice provision and acceptance of
reasonable measures by the declarant to cure the conditions.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
2. A new section is added
to chapter 64.34 RCW to read as follows:

Agreements entered into
between a declarant and all of the original purchasers of units in a
condominium shall be binding upon the association and subsequent purchasers.

Sec. 3. RCW 64.34.100 and 1989 c
43 s 1-113 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) The remedies
provided by this chapter shall be liberally administered to the end that the
aggrieved party is put in as good a position as if the other party had fully
performed. However, consequential, special, or punitive damages may not be
awarded except as specifically provided in this chapter or by other rule of
law.

(2) Any right or
obligation declared by this chapter is enforceable by judicial proceeding or
by arbitration as provided for either in a written agreement signed by the unit
purchaser or in the declaration.

Sec. 4. RCW 64.34.450 and 1989 c
43 s 4-113 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) Except as limited
by subsection (2) of this section, implied warranties of quality:

(a) May be excluded or
modified by written agreement of the parties; and

(b) Are excluded by
written expression of disclaimer, such as "as is," "with all
faults," or other language which in common understanding calls the buyer's
attention to the exclusion of warranties.

(2) With respect to a
purchaser of a unit that may be occupied for residential use, ((no)) a
general disclaimer, as described in subsection (1)(b) of this section,
of implied warranties of quality is effective((, but a declarant and any
dealer may disclaim liability in an instrument signed by the purchaser for a
specified defect or specified failure to comply with applicable law, if the
defect or failure entered into and became a part of the basis of the bargain))
if contained in an instrument signed by the buyer and the disclaimer was
entered into and became a part of the basis of the bargain. However, to the
extent that the disclaimer relates to structural elements of the condominium or
building code, provisions affecting life; safety, including fire protection; or
the habitability of the unit, the disclaimer must specify the (a) defect, (b)
failure to comply with applicable law, or (c) aspect or category of
construction affected by the disclaimer.

Sec. 5. RCW 64.34.452 and 1990 c
166 s 14 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) A judicial
proceeding or arbitration for breach of any obligations arising under
RCW 64.34.443 and 64.34.445 must be commenced within four years after the cause
of action accrues((: PROVIDED, That)). However, the period for
commencing an action for a breach accruing pursuant to subsection (2)(b) of
this section shall not expire prior to one year after termination of the period
of declarant control, if any, under RCW 64.34.308(4). Such period may not be
reduced by either oral or written agreement.

(2) Subject to
subsection (3) of this section, a cause of action or breach of warranty of
quality, regardless of the purchaser's lack of knowledge of the breach,
accrues:

(a) As to a unit, the date
the purchaser to whom the warranty is first made enters into possession if a
possessory interest was conveyed or the date of acceptance of the instrument of
conveyance if a nonpossessory interest was conveyed; and

(b) As to each common
element, at the latest of (i) the date the first unit in the condominium was
conveyed to a bona fide purchaser, (ii) the date the common element was
completed, or (iii) the date the common element was added to the condominium.

(3) If a
warranty of quality explicitly extends to future performance or duration of any
improvement or component of the condominium, the cause of action accrues at the
time the breach is discovered or at the end of the period for which the
warranty explicitly extends, whichever is earlier.

---
END ---