BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF
WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec.
1. (1) The legislature finds
that agriculture is vital to the history, economy, culture, and future of
Washington state. The promotion of agriculture requires that farmers have
access to reasonably priced insurance to protect against the risk of financial
losses resulting from crop damage or failure. The private insurance market
does not offer affordable insurance that protects against all of the risks faced
by farmers with respect to their crops. Accordingly, farmers must rely on
federal crop insurance corporation programs to stabilize farm finances when
crops are damaged by weather or natural disaster. These programs allow farmers
to pay a nominal administrative fee in order to obtain some coverage against
risks, but farmers often have to turn to the private market in order to obtain
additional insurance that may be needed. The programs are federally regulated
but the policies themselves are sold by agents who are licensed by the
insurance commissioner.

(2) The legislature
finds that the terms of the insurance programs administered by the federal crop
insurance corporation are complex and that farmers are often not provided with
information sufficient to make informed decisions about the suitability of the
insurance that is offered.

(3) The legislature
declares that it is in the public interest that farmers be fully informed as to
the coverages, limitations, and exclusions of crop insurance, and that
therefore the sellers of this insurance should be required to provide detailed
and comprehensive disclosures regarding the terms of the insurance.

(4) The legislature
declares that the insurance commissioner should be granted the authority
necessary to adopt rules establishing disclosure standards for the sale of crop
insurance.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
2. A new section is added
to chapter 48.01 RCW to read as follows:

(1) For the purposes of
this section:

(a) "Crop
insurance" means any policy of insurance relating to the loss or damage of
agricultural crops resulting from weather, pests, natural disasters, or other
causes; and

(b) "Insurance
transaction" has the same meaning as defined in RCW 48.01.060.

(2) An insurer, agent, solicitor,
or broker shall comply with the following procedures with respect to any
insurance transaction related to a crop insurance policy:

(a) Each applicant for
insurance coverage shall be provided with a written disclosure statement that
clearly describes the terms of the policy in accordance with the disclosure
requirements established by the commissioner under subsection (3) of this
section;

(b) The disclosure
statement must be signed by the applicant and the applicant shall receive a
copy of the signed document;

(c) A copy of the
signed disclosure statement shall be forwarded to the insurer providing the
crop insurance coverage;

(d) The insurer shall
verify that the disclosure statement has been signed by the applicant and that
the form and substance of the statement comply with the requirements
established by the commissioner under subsection (3) of this section; and

(e) The insurer shall
retain a copy of the signed disclosure statement for a period of not less than
three years from the effective date of the insurance coverage.

(3) The commissioner
shall adopt rules specifying the content and format of the disclosure statement
required under this section.

(4) Failure to comply
with the requirements of this section is an unfair method of competition and an
unfair or deceptive act or practice and the commissioner shall pursue the
remedies and penalties under RCW 48.30.010.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
3. A new section is added
to chapter 48.17 RCW to read as follows:

Every insurer,
agent, solicitor, or broker shall comply with section 2 of this act.

---
END ---