BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF
WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec.
1. A new section is added
to chapter 15.17 RCW to read as follows:

To provide uniformity
in the marketplace and to protect consignors of apples, the director shall
revise state standards for grades and packs of apples. The director shall
adopt revisions to the standards for grades and packs of apples that will
clarify the standards in such a way that they will be applied consistently among
warehouses and commission merchants. That is, these revisions must provide a
level of uniformity that will ensure that the apples of a particular variety,
grade, and pack sold from one warehouse will be the same as the apples of the
same variety, grade, and pack sold from any other warehouse. For this purpose,
the director shall invite a grades and packs committee that is widely
recognized within the horticultural industry as representing the interests of
the industry regarding grades and packs of apples to recommend by consensus
revisions to the standards that it believes will provide that uniformity. If
the industry committee recommends such revisions by committee consensus by
January 1, 2004, the director shall immediately initiate rule making and give
great weight to proposing and adopting the recommendations of the committee.
If the committee does not make the recommendations by committee consensus by
January 1, 2004, the director shall adopt revisions to the standards the
director believes will provide such uniformity by January 1, 2005.

Sec. 2. RCW 20.01.440 and 1991 c
109 s 23 are each amended to read as follows:

Every commission
merchant shall retain a copy of all records covering each transaction for a
period of three years from the date thereof, which copy shall at all times be
available for, and open to, the confidential inspection of the director and the
consignor, or authorized representative of either. Upon the request of the
consignor or the authorized representative of the consignor, the information
shall be rendered to the consignor or the authorized representative; however,
for a pooling arrangement, the information to be rendered is the information
that must be rendered under RCW 20.01.370 or, upon final remittance, the
information that must be transmitted under RCW 20.01.370. In the event of
any dispute or disagreement between a consignor and a commission merchant
arising at the time of delivery as to condition, quality, grade, pack,
quantity, or weight of any lot, shipment or consignment of agricultural
products, the department shall furnish, upon the payment of a reasonable fee
therefor by the requesting party, a certificate establishing the condition,
quality, grade, pack, quantity, or weight of such lot, shipment, or
consignment. Such certificate shall be prima facie evidence in all courts of
this state as to the recitals thereof. The burden of proof shall be upon the
commission merchant to prove the correctness of his or her accounting as
to any transaction which may be questioned.

Sec. 3. RCW 20.01.370 and 1991 c
109 s 20 are each amended to read as follows:

Every commission
merchant taking control of any agricultural products for sale as such
commission merchant, shall promptly make and keep for a period of three years,
beginning on the day the sale of the product is complete, a correct record
showing in detail the following with reference to the handling, sale, or
storage of such agricultural products:

(1) The name and
address of the consignor.

(2) The date received.

(3) The quality and
quantity delivered by the consignor, and where applicable the dockage, tare,
grade, size, net weight, or quantity.

(4) An accounting of
all sales, including dates, terms of sales, quality and quantity of
agricultural products sold, and proof of payments received on behalf of the
consignor.

(5) The terms of
payment to the producer.

(6) An itemized
statement of the charges to be paid by consignor in connection with the sale.

(7) The names and
addresses of all purchasers if said commission merchant has any financial
interest in the business of said purchasers, or if said purchasers have any
financial interest in the business of said commission merchant, directly or
indirectly, as holder of the other's corporate stock, as copartner, as lender
or borrower of money to or from the other, or otherwise. Such interest shall
be noted in said records following the name of any such purchaser.

(8) A lot number or
other identifying mark for each consignment, which number or mark shall appear
on all sales tags and other essential records needed to show what the
agricultural products actually sold for.

(9) Any claim or claims
which have been or may be filed by the commission merchant against any person
for overcharges or for damages resulting from the injury or deterioration of
such agricultural products by the act, neglect or failure of such person and
such records shall be open to the inspection of the director and the consignor
of agricultural products for whom such claim or claims are made.

Before a commission
merchant may handle an agricultural product in a pooling arrangement or
accounting, the consignor must have agreed in writing to allow the pooling.

Where a pooling
arrangement is agreed to in writing between the consignor and commission
merchant, the reporting requirements of subsections (4), (5), (6), and (8) of
this section shall apply to the pool rather than to the individual consignor or
consignment and the records of the pool shall be available for inspection by
any consignor to that pool and, upon the request of the consignor, shall be
rendered to the consignor.

For
individual accounting, the commission merchant shall transmit a copy of the
record required by this section to the consignor on the same day the final
remittance is made to the consignor as required by RCW 20.01.430. For a
consignor who is participating in a pooling arrangement, the commission
merchant shall, on the same day final remittance and accounting are made to the
consignor as required by RCW 20.01.430, transmit to the consignor a summary of
the records which are available for inspection by any consignor to that pool.

Sec. 4. RCW 20.01.420 and 1991 c
109 s 22 are each amended to read as follows:

When
requested by a consignor, a commission merchant shall promptly make available
to the consignor or to the director all records of the ongoing sales of the
consignor's agricultural products showing the amount sold, the selling price,
and any other information required under RCW 20.01.370. Upon the request of
the consignor, such information as must be rendered to the consignor under RCW
20.01.370 shall be rendered to the consignor and, upon final remittance, such
information as must be transmitted to the consignor under RCW 20.01.370 shall
be rendered to the consignor.

---
END ---