BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF
WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1. RCW 9.46.0221 and 1987 c
4 s 7 are each amended to read as follows:

"Commission,"
as used in this chapter, means the Washington state ((gambling)) gaming
commission created in RCW 9.46.040.

Sec. 2. RCW 9.46.040 and 1974
ex.s. c 155 s 12 are each amended to read as follows:

There shall be a
commission, known as the "Washington state ((gambling)) gaming
commission", consisting of five members appointed by the governor with the
consent of the senate. The members of the commission shall be appointed within
thirty days of July 16, 1973 for terms beginning July 1, 1973, and expiring as
follows: One member of the commission for a term expiring July 1, 1975; one
member of the commission for a term expiring July 1, 1976; one member of the
commission for a term expiring July 1, 1977; one member of the commission for a
term expiring July 1, 1978; and one member of the commission for a term
expiring July 1, 1979; each as the governor so determines. Their successors, all
of whom shall be citizen members appointed by the governor with the consent of
the senate, upon being appointed and qualified, shall serve six year terms:
PROVIDED, That no member of the commission who has served a full six year term
shall be eligible for reappointment. In case of a vacancy, it shall be filled
by appointment by the governor for the unexpired portion of the term in which
said vacancy occurs. No vacancy in the membership of the commission shall
impair the right of the remaining member or members to act, except as in RCW
9.46.050(2) provided.

In addition to the
members of the commission there shall be four ex officio members without vote
from the legislature consisting of: (1) Two members of the senate, one from
the majority political party and one from the minority political party, both to
be appointed by the president of the senate; (2) two members of the house of
representatives, one from the majority political party and one from the
minority political party, both to be appointed by the speaker of the house of
representatives; such appointments shall be for the term of two years or for
the period in which the appointee serves as a legislator, whichever expires
first; members may be reappointed; vacancies shall be filled in the same manner
as original appointments are made. Such ex officio members who shall collect
data deemed essential to future legislative proposals and exchange information
with the board shall be deemed engaged in legislative business while in
attendance upon the business of the board and shall be limited to such
allowances therefor as otherwise provided in RCW 44.04.120, the same to be paid
from the "gambling revolving fund" as being expenses relative to
commission business.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
3. A new section is added
to chapter 9.46 RCW to read as follows:

(1) The state lottery
commission and the Washington horse racing commission are abolished and the
powers, duties, and functions of the state lottery commission and the
Washington horse racing commission are transferred to the Washington state
gaming commission. All references to the director or commissioners or the
state lottery commission and the Washington horse racing commission in the
Revised Code of Washington shall be construed to mean the director or the
Washington state gaming commission.

(2)(a) All reports,
documents, surveys, books, records, files, papers, or written material in the
possession of the state lottery commission and the Washington horse racing
commission pertaining to the powers, functions, and duties transferred shall be
delivered to the custody of the Washington state gaming commission. All
cabinets, furniture, office equipment, motor vehicles, and other tangible
property employed by the state lottery commission and the Washington horse
racing commission in carrying out the powers, functions, and duties transferred
shall be made available to the Washington state gaming commission. All funds,
credits, or other assets held by the state lottery commission and the
Washington horse racing commission shall be assigned to the Washington state
gaming commission.

(b) Any appropriations
made to the state lottery commission and the Washington horse racing commission
shall, on the effective date of this section, be transferred and credited to
the Washington state gaming commission.

(c) Whenever any
question arises as to the transfer of any personnel, funds, books, documents,
records, papers, files, equipment, or other tangible property used or held in
the exercise of the powers and the performance of the duties and functions
transferred, the director of financial management shall make a determination as
to the proper allocation and certify the same to the state agencies concerned.

(3) All employees of
the state lottery commission and the Washington horse racing commission are
transferred to the jurisdiction of the Washington state gaming commission. All
employees classified under chapter 41.06 RCW, the state civil service law, are
assigned to the Washington state gaming commission to perform their usual
duties upon the same terms as formerly, without any loss of rights, subject to
any action that may be appropriate thereafter in accordance with the laws and
rules governing state civil service.

(4) All rules and all
pending business before the state lottery commission and the Washington horse
racing commission shall be continued and acted upon by the Washington state
gaming commission. All existing contracts and obligations remain in full force
and shall be performed by the Washington state gaming commission.

(5) The transfer of the
powers, duties, functions, and personnel of the state lottery commission and
the Washington horse racing commission shall not affect the validity of any act
performed before the effective date of this section.

(6) If apportionments
of budgeted funds are required because of the transfers directed by this
section, the director of financial management shall certify the apportionments
to the agencies affected, the state auditor, and the state treasurer. Each of
these shall make the appropriate transfer and adjustments in funds and
appropriation accounts and equipment records in accordance with the
certification.

(7) Nothing contained
in this section may be construed to alter any existing collective bargaining
unit or the provisions of any existing collective bargaining agreement until
the agreement has expired or until the bargaining unit has been modified by
action of the personnel board as provided by law.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 4. The code reviser shall
change references, in the Revised Code of Washington, to the state lottery
commission, the Washington horse racing commission, and the Washington state
gambling commission to the Washington state gaming commission.

---
END ---