BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF
WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1. RCW 20.01.430 and 1982 c
20 s 3 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) Every
commission merchant shall remit to the consignor of any agricultural product
the full price for which such agricultural product was sold within thirty days
of the date of sale, or in the case of livestock within seven days of the date
of sale unless otherwise mutually agreed between grower and commission
merchant. The remittance to the consignor shall include all collections,
overcharges, and damages, less the agreed commission and other charges and
advances, and a complete account of the sale. Where payment for livestock is
made by mail, payment is timely if mailed within seven days of the date of sale
unless otherwise specified in an agreement between the producer and the dealer
in livestock. This subsection (1) does not apply to the sale of fresh fruit
by a commission merchant for a consignor.

(2)(a) When a
commission merchant sells fresh fruit for a consignor, the full price the fruit
is sold for is due and payable within thirty days of the date the fruit is
shipped by the commission merchant. The commission merchant shall bill the
purchaser in a timely manner so that the thirty-day deadline can be met.

(b) The commission
merchant shall charge the purchaser interest at an annual rate of eight percent
on any portion of the full price that is not paid by the purchaser for each day
after the thirty-day deadline specified in (a) of this subsection that the full
price remains unpaid. Any interest assessed by the commission merchant under
this section is payable by the purchaser to the commission merchant and by the
commission merchant to the consignor. Not later than the last day of each
thirty-day period after the fruit is shipped, the commission merchant shall pay
the consignor all portions of the sale price and interest received by the
commission merchant for the sale during that thirty-day period until the
amounts owed the consignor, including interest, are fully paid.

(c) Once fruit is
shipped under (a) of this subsection, the amounts owed the consignor for the
sale, including any interest, must not be adjusted downward by the purchaser,
the commission merchant, or any other person for any reason whatsoever.

(d) It is a
violation of this chapter for any commission merchant to benefit financially,
benefit through any improvement in the merchant's marketing ability, or benefit
in any other material way by extending beyond the thirty-day deadline specified
in (a) of this subsection the date by which the amounts owed a consignor for a
sale are paid by the commission merchant to the consignor.

Sec. 2. RCW 20.01.480 and 1977
ex.s. c 304 s 13 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) When a
violation has occurred which results in improper payment or nonpayment and a
claim is made to the department and the payment is secured through the actions
of the department, the charges made to the consignor for the action of the
department in the matter will depend upon the delay of reporting after such
improper payment or nonpayment would normally become obvious to the consignor
as follows:

(((1))) (a)
When reported within thirty days, no charge.

(((2))) (b)
When reported thirty days to one hundred eighty days, five percent.

(((3))) (c)
When reported after one hundred eighty days, ten percent.

(2) The
charges specified in subsection (1) of this section are in addition to the
eight percent interest requirement specified in RCW 20.01.430(2).

---
END ---