BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF
WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec.
1. It is the purpose of this
chapter to:

(1) Substantially
increase the procurement of Washington grown or raised agricultural products by
all local and state governmental agencies and public schools, and encourage a
comparable commitment by Washington state citizens and businesses in their
purchasing practices;

(2) Target government
procurement policies and goals toward those Washington grown or raised
agricultural products for which there are significant market development needs
or that may substantially contribute to increasing the economic viability of
the state's agricultural industry;

(3) Provide the
authority for all governmental agencies to adopt preferential purchasing
policies for Washington grown or raised agricultural products;

(4) Direct state
agencies to develop strategies to increase purchases of Washington grown or
raised agricultural products, and provide specific goals for procurement of
these products; and

(5) Provide guidance
and direction for local governments and other public agencies to develop plans
for increasing the procurement of Washington grown or raised agricultural
products.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
2. The definitions in this
section apply throughout this chapter unless the context clearly requires
otherwise.

(1) "Agricultural
products" means any horticultural, viticultural, dairy, livestock, fish,
poultry, poultry product, bee, grain, and farm products that are grown or
raised in Washington.

(2)
"Department" means the department of general administration.

(3)
"Director" means the director of the department of general
administration.

(4) "Local
government" means a city, town, county, special purpose district, school
district, or other municipal corporation.

(5) "Procurement
officer" means the person that has the primary responsibility for
procurement of materials or products.

(6) "State
agency" means all units of state government, including divisions of the
governor's office, the legislature, the judiciary, state agencies and
departments, correctional institutions, vocational-technical institutions, and
universities and colleges.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
3. A state agency, when
purchasing agricultural products:

(1) Must purchase
products grown or raised in Washington state when the products are readily
available and can be delivered in time for its intended purpose;

(2) May, when
Washington state agricultural products are not available, buy agricultural
products grown or raised in the United States; and

(3) May only purchase
agricultural products grown or raised outside the United States when products
grown, raised, or produced in Washington state or the United States are not
available.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
4. (1) By July 1, 2003,
state agencies must comply with section 3 of this act. State agencies that
fail to comply shall be issued a warning by the department and provided ninety
days to bring their purchasing policies into compliance. After this warning,
the department may issue a penalty of up to ten thousand dollars for each
additional violation.

(2) The department
shall develop a data base of available agricultural products grown or raised in
Washington state, and vendors supplying those products.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
5. (1) By January 1, 2003,
each local government shall review its existing procurement policies and
specifications to determine whether Washington grown or raised agricultural
products are excluded. The policies and specifications shall be revised to
include those products.

(2) By January 1, 2004,
each local government shall adopt a minimum purchasing goal for Washington
grown or raised agricultural products as a percentage of the total dollar value
of agricultural products purchased. To assist in achieving this goal, each
local government shall adopt a strategy by January 1, 2003, and shall submit a
description of the strategy to the department. All public agencies shall
respond to requests for information from the department for the purpose of the
reporting requirements under this section.

(3) Each local
government shall designate a procurement officer who shall serve as the primary
contact with the department for compliance with the requirements of this
chapter.

(4) This section
applies only to local governments with expenditures for supplies exceeding five
hundred thousand dollars for fiscal year 1998. Expenditures for capital goods
and for electricity, water, or gas for resale are not considered a supply
expenditure.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
6. Each local government
shall consider the adoption of policies, rules, or ordinances to provide for
the preferential purchase of Washington grown or raised agricultural products.
Any local government may adopt the preferential purchasing policy of the
department, or portion of such policy, or another policy that provides a
preference for Washington grown or raised agricultural products.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 7. Sections 1 through 6 of
this act constitute a new chapter in Title 43 RCW.

---
END ---