BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF
WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec.
1. The legislature finds
that the success of the state's education reform efforts were intended to be
evaluated using a variety of assessment measures. The legislature finds that
those measures were to include criterion-referenced and performance-based measures
that were intended for use by educators to evaluate those educators'
instructional practices. The legislature also finds that, to date, only state
level criterion-referenced measures have been developed for these purposes.
The legislature further finds that performance-based measures need to be
developed and that school districts should be able to develop their own
performance-based and criterion-referenced assessments to measure the progress
of students toward meeting state and district academic standards. The
legislature intends to implement the original provisions of House Bill No. 1209
from the 1993 legislative session by giving to school districts and educational
service districts the authority to develop and use locally developed
assessments in lieu of the state-developed assessment of student learning.

Sec. 2. RCW 28A.655.010 and 1993
c 336 s 201 are each amended to read as follows:

Unless the context
clearly requires otherwise, the definitions in this section apply throughout
RCW ((28A.630.885)) 28A.655.060 and 28A.300.130.

(1)
"Commission" means the commission on student learning created in RCW
((28A.630.885)) 28A.655.060.

(2) "Student
learning goals" ((mean[s])) means the goals established in
RCW 28A.150.210.

(3) "Essential
academic learning requirements" means more specific academic and technical
skills and knowledge, based on the student learning goals, as determined under
RCW ((28A.630.885(3)(a))) 28A.655.060(3)(a). Essential academic
learning requirements shall not limit the instructional strategies used by
schools or school districts or require the use of specific curriculum.

(4) "Performance
standards" or "standards" means the criteria used to determine
if a student has successfully learned the specific knowledge or skill being
assessed as determined under RCW ((28A.630.885(3)(b))) 28A.655.060(3)(b).
The standards should be set at internationally competitive levels.

(5) "Assessment
system" or "student assessment system" means a series of
assessments used to determine if students have successfully learned the
essential academic learning requirements. The assessment system shall be called
the Washington assessment of student learning and shall include state
assessments, local assessments, and alternative assessments developed under
RCW ((28A.630.885(3)(b))) 28A.655.060(3)(b). The system shall
also include assessments developed in response to the federal elementary and
secondary education act of 1965 (20 U.S.C. Sec. 6301 et seq.) as amended in
2002.

(6)
"Performance-based education system" means an education system in
which a significantly greater emphasis is placed on how well students are
learning, and significantly less emphasis is placed on state-level laws and
rules that dictate how instruction is to be provided. The performance-based
education system does not require that schools use an outcome-based
instructional model. Decisions regarding how instruction is provided are to be
made, to the greatest extent possible, by schools and school districts, not by
the state.

Sec. 3. RCW 28A.655.060 and 2001
2nd sp.s. c 20 s 1 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) The Washington
commission on student learning is hereby established. The primary purposes of
the commission are to identify the knowledge and skills all public school
students need to know and be able to do based on the student learning goals in
RCW 28A.150.210, to develop student assessment and school accountability
systems, to review current school district data reporting requirements and make
recommendations on what data is necessary for the purposes of accountability
and meeting state information needs, and to take other steps necessary to
develop a performance-based education system. The commission shall include
three members of the state board of education, three members appointed by the
governor before July 1, 1992, and five members appointed no later than June 1,
1993, by the governor elected in the November 1992 election. The governor
shall appoint a chair from the commission members, and fill any vacancies in
gubernatorial appointments that may occur. The state board of education shall
fill any vacancies of state board of education appointments that may occur. In
making the appointments, educators, business leaders, and parents shall be
represented, and nominations from statewide education, business, and parent
organizations shall be requested. Efforts shall be made to ensure that the
commission reflects the racial and ethnic diversity of the state's K-12 student
population and that the major geographic regions in the state are represented.
Appointees shall be qualified individuals who are supportive of educational
restructuring, who have a positive record of service, and who will devote
sufficient time to the responsibilities of the commission to ensure that the
objectives of the commission are achieved.

(2) The commission
shall establish advisory committees. Membership of the advisory committees
shall include, but not necessarily be limited to, professionals from the office
of the superintendent of public instruction and the state board of education,
and other state and local educational practitioners and student assessment
specialists.

(3) The commission,
with the assistance of the advisory committees, shall:

(a) Develop essential
academic learning requirements based on the student learning goals in RCW
28A.150.210. Essential academic learning requirements shall be developed, to
the extent possible, for each of the student learning goals in RCW 28A.150.210.
Goals one and two shall be considered primary. Essential academic learning
requirements for RCW 28A.150.210(1), goal one, and the mathematics component of
RCW 28A.150.210(2), goal two, shall be completed no later than March 1, 1995.
Essential academic learning requirements that incorporate the remainder of RCW
28A.150.210 (2), (3), and (4), goals two, three, and four, shall be completed
no later than March 1, 1996. To the maximum extent possible, the commission
shall integrate goal four and the knowledge and skill areas in the other goals
in the development of the essential academic learning requirements;

(b)(i) The commission
and superintendent of public instruction shall develop a statewide academic
assessment system for use in the elementary, middle, and high school years
designed to determine if each student has learned the essential academic
learning requirements identified in (a) of this subsection. The academic
assessment system shall include a variety of assessment methods, including criterion-referenced
and performance-based measures. Performance standards for determining if a
student has successfully completed an assessment shall be determined by the
commission and the superintendent of public instruction in consultation with
the advisory committees required in subsection (2) of this section. School
districts shall assess elementary, middle, and high school students in language
arts, mathematics, and science, and may assess them in social studies, the
arts, and health and fitness, using either the state assessment or a comparable
assessment developed by the school district or an educational service
district. School districts shall assess students in the fourth, seventh, and
tenth grades and may add assessments in other grades as assessments are
developed at the state or local level. The locally developed assessments
shall be submitted to the office of the superintendent of public instruction
for its review before the assessments are used and the office may require the
modification of the assessments before they are used in lieu of the state
assessment. Until locally developed assessments are ready for use, school
districts shall use the state assessments. The assessment system shall also
include alternative performance-based assessments that may be developed by the
office of the superintendent of public instruction or an educational service
district or a school district and that may include portfolios for high school
students. The results of all such assessments shall be reported to parents,
the superintendent of public instruction, and the public, using a format
developed by the superintendent of public instruction and as required under RCW
28A.655.090 and 28A.655.100.

(ii) The assessment
system shall be designed so that the results under the assessment system are
used by educators as tools to evaluate instructional practices, and to initiate
appropriate educational support for students who have not learned the essential
academic learning requirements at the appropriate periods in the student's
educational development.

(iii) Assessments
measuring the essential academic learning requirements shall be available for
voluntary use by school districts and shall be required to be administered by
school districts according to the following schedule unless the legislature
takes action to delay or prevent implementation of the assessment system and
essential academic learning requirements.

Assessments Assessments

available
for required to be

voluntary
use administered

(School
years) (School years)

((Reading, Writing,

Communication)) Language Arts,

Mathematics

- Elementary school 1996-97 1997-98

- Middle school 1997-98 2000-01

- High school 1998-99 2000-01

Science

- High school 2002-03 2003-04

- Middle school 2002-03 2003-04

- Elementary school 2003-04 2004-05

Social Studies

- Elementary, middle, 2004-05 ((2007-08))

and high school

Arts

- Middle and high 2005-06 ((2008-09))

school

- Elementary school 2005-06 ((2009-10))

Health, Fitness

- Middle and high 2005-06 ((2008-09))

school

- Elementary school 2005-06 ((2009-10))

The completed
assessments and assessments still in development shall be transferred by the
commission on student learning to the superintendent of public instruction by
June 30, 1999.

(iv) To the maximum
extent possible, the commission and the superintendent of public instruction
shall integrate knowledge and skill areas in development of the assessments.

Assessments for goals
three and four of RCW 28A.150.210 shall be integrated in the essential academic
learning requirements and assessments for goals one and two.

(v) The commission on
student learning may modify the essential academic learning requirements and
the assessments, as needed, before June 30, 1999. The superintendent of public
instruction may modify the essential academic learning requirements and the
assessments, as needed, after June 30, 1999. The commission and superintendent
shall, upon request, provide opportunities for the education committees of the
house of representatives and the senate to review the assessments and proposed
modifications to the essential academic learning requirements before the
modifications are adopted.

(vi) The commission and
the superintendent of public instruction shall develop assessments that are
directly related to the essential academic learning requirements, and are not
biased toward persons with different learning styles, racial or ethnic
backgrounds, or on the basis of gender;

(c) After a
determination is made by the state board of education that the high school
assessment system has been implemented and that it is sufficiently reliable and
valid, successful completion of the high school assessment in language arts
and mathematics shall lead to a certificate of mastery. The certificate of
mastery shall be obtained by most students at about the age of sixteen, and is
evidence that the student has successfully mastered the essential academic
learning requirements in language arts and mathematics during his or her
educational career. The certificate of mastery shall be required for
graduation but shall not be the only requirement for graduation. School
districts may waive the certificate of mastery graduation requirement for a
student who has taken but not successfully completed the high school assessment
in language arts and mathematics and who has obtained at least four credits in
language arts and mathematics beyond those required to meet district graduation
requirements. The commission shall make recommendations to the state board
of education regarding the relationship between the certificate of mastery and
high school graduation requirements. Upon achieving the certificate of
mastery, schools shall provide students with the opportunity to pursue career
and educational objectives through educational pathways that emphasize
integration of academic and vocational education. Educational pathways may
include, but are not limited to, programs such as work-based learning,
school-to-work transition, tech prep, vocational-technical education, running
start, and preparation for technical college, community college, or university
education. Any middle school, junior high school, or high school using
educational pathways shall ensure that all participating students will continue
to have access to the courses and instruction necessary to meet admission
requirements at baccalaureate institutions. Students shall be allowed to enter
the educational pathway of their choice. Before accepting a student into an
educational pathway, the school shall inform the student's parent of the
pathway chosen, the opportunities available to the student through the pathway,
and the career objectives the student will have exposure to while pursuing the
pathway. Parents and students dissatisfied with the opportunities available
through the selected educational pathway shall be provided with the opportunity
to transfer the student to any other pathway provided in the school. Schools may
not develop educational pathways that retain students in high school beyond the
date they are eligible to graduate, and may not require students who transfer
between pathways to complete pathway requirements beyond the date the student
is eligible to graduate;

(d) Consider methods to
address the unique needs of special education students when developing the
assessments in (b) and (c) of this subsection;

(e) Consider methods to
address the unique needs of highly capable students when developing the assessments
in (b) and (c) of this subsection;

(f) Develop
recommendations on the time, support, and resources, including technical
assistance, needed by schools and school districts to help students achieve the
essential academic learning requirements. These recommendations shall include
an estimate for the legislature, superintendent of public instruction, and
governor on the expected cost of implementing the academic assessment system;

(g) Develop
recommendations for consideration by the higher education coordinating board
for adopting college and university entrance requirements for public school
students that are consistent with the essential academic learning requirements
and the certificate of mastery;

(h) Review current
school district data reporting requirements for the purposes of accountability
and meeting state information needs. The commission on student learning shall
report recommendations to the joint select committee on education restructuring
by September 15, 1996, on:

(i) What data is necessary
to compare how school districts are performing before the essential academic
learning requirements and the assessment system are implemented with how school
districts are performing after the essential academic learning requirements and
the assessment system are implemented; and

(ii) What data is
necessary pertaining to school district reports under the accountability
systems developed by the commission on student learning under this section;

(i) Recommend to the
legislature, governor, state board of education, and superintendent of public
instruction:

(i) A statewide
accountability system to monitor and evaluate accurately and fairly at
elementary, middle, and high schools the level of learning occurring in
individual schools and school districts with regard to the goals included in
RCW 28A.150.210 (1) through (4). The accountability system must assess each
school individually against its own baseline, schools with similar
characteristics, and schools statewide. The system shall include school-site,
school district, and state-level accountability reports;

(ii) A school
assistance program to help schools and school districts that are having
difficulty helping students meet the essential academic learning requirements
as measured by performance on the elementary, middle school, and high school
assessments;

(iii) A system to
intervene in schools and school districts in which significant numbers of
students persistently fail to learn the essential academic learning
requirements or meet the standards established for the elementary, middle
school, and high school assessments; and

(iv) An awards program
to provide incentives to school staff to help their students learn the
essential academic learning requirements, with each school being assessed
individually against its own baseline, schools with similar characteristics,
and the statewide average. Incentives shall be based on the rate of percentage
change of students achieving the essential academic learning requirements and
progress on meeting the statewide average. School staff shall determine how
the awards will be spent.

The commission shall
make recommendations regarding a statewide accountability system for reading in
grades kindergarten through four by November 1, 1997. Recommendations for an
accountability system in the other subject areas and grade levels shall be made
no later than June 30, 1999;

(j) Report annually by
December 1st to the legislature, the governor, the superintendent of public
instruction, and the state board of education on the progress, findings, and
recommendations of the commission; and

(k) Make
recommendations to the legislature and take other actions necessary or
desirable to help students meet the student learning goals.

(4) The commission
shall coordinate its activities with the state board of education and the
office of the superintendent of public instruction.

(5) The commission
shall seek advice broadly from the public and all interested educational
organizations in the conduct of its work, including holding periodic regional
public hearings.

(6) The commission
shall select an entity to provide staff support and the office of the
superintendent of public instruction shall provide administrative oversight and
be the fiscal agent for the commission. The commission may direct the office
of the superintendent of public instruction to enter into subcontracts, within
the commission's resources, with school districts, teachers, higher education
faculty, state agencies, business organizations, and other individuals and organizations
to assist the commission in its deliberations.

(7) Members of the
commission shall be reimbursed for travel expenses as provided in RCW 43.03.050
and 43.03.060.

(8)(a) By September 30,
1997, the commission on student learning, the state board of education, and the
superintendent of public instruction shall jointly present recommendations to
the education committees of the house of representatives and the senate
regarding the high school assessments, the certificate of mastery, and high
school graduation requirements.

In preparing
recommendations, the commission on student learning shall convene an ad hoc
working group to address questions, including:

(i) What type of
document shall be used to identify student performance and achievement and how
will the document be described?

(ii) Should the
students be required to pass the high school assessments in all skill and
content areas, or only in select skill and content areas, to graduate?

(iii) How will the
criteria for establishing the standards for passing scores on the assessments
be determined?

(iv) What timeline
should be used in phasing-in the assessments as a graduation requirement?

(v) What options may be
used in demonstrating how the results of the assessments will be displayed in a
way that is meaningful to students, parents, institutions of higher education,
and potential employers?

(vi) Are there other or
additional methods by which the assessments could be used to identify
achievement such as endorsements, standards of proficiency, merit badges, or
levels of achievement?

(vii) Should the
assessments and certificate of mastery be used to satisfy college or university
entrance criteria for public school students? If yes, how should these methods
be phased-in?

(b) The ad hoc working
group shall report its recommendations to the commission on student learning,
the state board of education, and the superintendent of public instruction by
June 15, 1997. The commission shall report the ad hoc working group's
recommendations to the education committees of the house of representatives and
senate by July 15, 1997. Final recommendations of the commission on student
learning, the state board of education, and the superintendent of public
instruction shall be presented to the education committees of the house of
representatives and the senate by September 30, 1997.

(9) The Washington
commission on student learning shall expire on June 30, 1999.

Sec. 4. RCW 28A.655.090 and 1999
c 388 s 301 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) By September 10,
1998, and by September 10th each year thereafter, the superintendent of public
instruction shall report to schools, school districts, and the legislature on
the results of the Washington assessment of student learning and state-mandated
norm-referenced standardized tests.

(2) The reports shall
include the assessment results by school and school district, and include
changes over time. For the Washington assessment of student learning, results
shall be reported as follows:

(a) The percentage of
students meeting the standards;

(b) The percentage of
students performing at each level of the assessment; and

(c) A learning
improvement index that shows changes in student performance within the
different levels of student learning reported on the Washington assessment of
student learning.

(3) The reports shall
contain data regarding the different characteristics of schools, such as poverty
levels, percent of English as a second language students, dropout rates,
attendance, percent of students in special education, and student mobility so
that districts and schools can learn from the improvement efforts of other
schools and districts with similar characteristics.

(4) The reports shall
contain student scores on mandated tests by comparable Washington schools of
similar characteristics.

(5) The reports shall
contain information on public school choice options available to students,
including vocational education.

(6) The reports shall
be posted on the superintendent of public instruction's internet web site.

(7) To protect the
privacy of students, the results of schools and districts that test fewer than
ten students in a grade level shall not be reported. In addition, in order to
ensure that results are reported accurately, the superintendent of public instruction
shall maintain the confidentiality of statewide data files until the
superintendent determines that the data are complete and accurate.

(8) The
superintendent of public instruction shall monitor the percentage and number of
special education and limited English-proficient students exempted from taking
the assessments by schools and school districts to ensure the exemptions are in
compliance with exemption guidelines. The assessment results of limited
English-proficient students who have been in the public schools in the United
States for fewer than three consecutive years shall not be included in the
assessment results for a school or school district.

---
END ---