BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF
WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec.
1. The legislature finds
that:

(1) The capacity of
many of Washington state's transportation facilities have failed to keep up
with the state's growth;

(2) Current
transportation revenues are not sufficient to fund, in a timely way, many of
the major capacity and other improvements required on the state's highways;

(3) The decision
whether to increase those revenues resides with the people who use the
transportation system and pay the taxes. The people are entitled to a choice
of options about how much additional revenue should be raised, if any, and how
to raise it, and what efficiencies to require as a condition for any additional
revenue.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
2. The legislature shall
exercise its authority under Article II, section 1(b) of the Washington state
Constitution to present two transportation funding plans to the voters.

(1) The two largest
political parties that have elected members in the Washington state legislature
shall each develop a transportation plan during the 2002 legislative session under
the direction of their respective legislative leaders. The legislative leaders
may consult with other interested parties or hold meetings to aid them in
developing the plan. The plan shall:

(a) Include additional
sources of revenue dedicated to transportation purposes;

(b) Require
efficiencies to ensure that all transportation revenue is spent effectively.

(2) The
legislature must pass each plan developed under subsection (1) of this section
as a separate referendum. This action must take place during the 2002
legislative session. The referendums shall be presented to the voters at the
next general election following the effective date of this act. For purposes
of this section, "2002 legislative session" includes any
extraordinary sessions convened prior to July 1, 2002.

---
END ---