BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF
WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec.
1. A new section is added
to chapter 41.45 RCW to read as follows:

The basic employer and
state contribution rates and plan 2 member contribution rates are changed to
reflect the 2000 actuarial valuation, incorporating the 1995-2000 actuarial
experience study conducted by the office of the state actuary. The results of
the 2000 actuarial valuation shall be adjusted to reflect an April 1, 2002,
implementation date.

(1) Beginning April 1,
2002, the following employer contribution rates shall be charged:

(a) 1.10 percent for
the public employees' retirement system; and

(b) 2.64 percent for
the law enforcement officers' and fire fighters' retirement system plan 2.

(2) Beginning April 1,
2002, the basic state contribution rate for the law enforcement officers' and
fire fighters' retirement system plan 2 shall be 1.75 percent.

(3) Beginning April 1,
2002, the following employer contribution rates shall be charged:

(a) 0.96 percent for
the school employees' retirement system; and

(b) 1.05 percent for
the teachers' retirement system.

(4) Beginning April 1,
2002, the following member contribution rates shall be charged:

(a) 0.65 percent for
the public employees' retirement system plan 2; and

(b) 4.39 percent for
the law enforcement officers' and fire fighters' retirement system plan 2.

(5) Beginning April 1,
2002, the following member contribution rates shall be charged:

(a) 0.35 percent for
the school employees' retirement system plan 2; and

(b) 0.15 percent for
the teachers' retirement system plan 2.

(6) The contribution
rates in this section shall be collected through June 30, 2003.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
2. RCW 41.45.053 (Contribution
rates--Collected through June 30, 2003) and 2001 2nd sp.s. c 11 s 9 are each
repealed.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 3. This act is necessary for
the immediate preservation of the public peace, health, or safety, or support
of the state government and its existing public institutions, and takes effect
April 1, 2002.

---
END ---