BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF
WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1. RCW 84.56.020 and 1996 c
153 s 1 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) The county
treasurer shall be the receiver and collector of all taxes extended upon the
tax rolls of the county, whether levied for state, county, school, bridge,
road, municipal or other purposes, and also of all fines, forfeitures or
penalties received by any person or officer for the use of his or her county.
All taxes upon real and personal property made payable by the provisions of
this title shall be due and payable to the treasurer on or before the thirtieth
day of April and, except as provided in this section, shall be delinquent after
that date.

(2) Each tax statement
shall include a notice that checks for payment of taxes may be made payable to
"Treasurer of . . . . . . County" or other
appropriate office, but tax statements shall not include any suggestion that
checks may be made payable to the name of the individual holding the office of
treasurer nor any other individual.

(3) When the total
amount of tax or special assessments on personal property or on any lot, block
or tract of real property payable by one person is fifty dollars or more, and
if one-half of such tax be paid on or before the thirtieth day of April, the
remainder of such tax shall be due and payable on or before the thirty-first
day of October following and shall be delinquent after that date.

(4) When the total
amount of tax or special assessments on any lot, block or tract of real
property or on any mobile home payable by one person is fifty dollars or more,
and if one-half of such tax be paid after the thirtieth day of April but before
the thirty-first day of October, together with the applicable interest and
penalty on the full amount of tax payable for that year, the remainder of such
tax shall be due and payable on or before the thirty-first day of October
following and shall be delinquent after that date.

(5) Delinquent taxes
under this section are subject to interest at the rate of ((twelve)) seven
percent per annum computed on a monthly basis on the full year amount of tax
unpaid from the date of delinquency until paid. Interest shall be calculated
at the rate in effect at the time of payment of the tax, regardless of when the
taxes were first delinquent. In addition, delinquent taxes under this section
are subject to penalties as follows:

(a) A penalty of three
percent of the full year amount of tax unpaid shall be assessed on the tax
delinquent on June 1st of the year in which the tax is due.

(b) An additional
penalty of ((eight)) three percent shall be assessed on the
amount of tax delinquent on December 1st of the year in which the tax is due.

(6) Subsection (5) of
this section notwithstanding, no interest or penalties may be assessed for the
period April 30, 1996, through December 31, 1996, on delinquent taxes imposed
in 1995 for collection in 1996 which are imposed on the personal residences
owned by military personnel who participated in the situation known as
"Joint Endeavor."

(7) For purposes of
this chapter, "interest" means both interest and penalties.

(8) All
collections of interest on delinquent taxes shall be credited to the county
current expense fund; but the cost of foreclosure and sale of real property,
and the fees and costs of distraint and sale of personal property, for
delinquent taxes, shall, when collected, be credited to the operation and
maintenance fund of the county treasurer prosecuting the foreclosure or
distraint or sale; and shall be used by the county treasurer as a revolving
fund to defray the cost of further foreclosure, distraint and sale for
delinquent taxes without regard to budget limitations.

--- END ---