BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF
WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1. RCW 41.40.630 and 2000 c
247 s 901 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) NORMAL RETIREMENT.
Except under subsection (4) of this section, any member with at least
five service credit years who has attained at least age sixty-five shall be
eligible to retire and to receive a retirement allowance computed according to
the provisions of RCW 41.40.620.

(2) EARLY RETIREMENT. Except
under subsection (4) of this section, any member who has completed at least
twenty service credit years and has attained age fifty-five shall be eligible
to retire and to receive a retirement allowance computed according to the
provisions of RCW 41.40.620, except that a member retiring pursuant to this
subsection shall have the retirement allowance actuarially reduced to reflect
the difference in the number of years between age at retirement and the
attainment of age sixty-five.

(3) ALTERNATE EARLY
RETIREMENT. Except under subsection (4) of this section, any member who
has completed at least thirty service credit years and has attained age
fifty-five shall be eligible to retire and to receive a retirement allowance
computed according to the provisions of RCW 41.40.620, except that a member
retiring pursuant to this subsection shall have the retirement allowance
reduced by three percent per year to reflect the difference in the number of
years between age at retirement and the attainment of age sixty-five.

(4) Any
liquor control officer member with at least twenty-five service credit years
who has attained at least age fifty-five is eligible to retire and receive a
retirement allowance computed under RCW 41.40.620, without an actuarially
reduced retirement allowance.

--- END ---