BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF
WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1. RCW 74.39A.030 and 2002
c 3 s 10 (Initiative Measure No. 775) are each amended to read as follows:

(1) To the extent of
available funding, the department shall expand cost-effective options for home
and community services for consumers for whom the state participates in the
cost of their care.

(2) In expanding home
and community services, the department shall: (a) Take full advantage of
federal funding available under Title XVIII and Title XIX of the federal social
security act, including home health, adult day care, waiver options, and state
plan services; and (b) be authorized to use funds available under its community
options program entry system waiver granted under section 1915(c) of the
federal social security act to expand the availability of in-home, adult
residential care, adult family homes, enhanced adult residential care, and
assisted living services. By June 30, 1997, the department shall undertake to
reduce the nursing home medicaid census by at least one thousand six hundred by
assisting individuals who would otherwise require nursing facility services to
obtain services of their choice, including assisted living services, enhanced
adult residential care, and other home and community services. If a resident,
or his or her legal representative, objects to a discharge decision initiated
by the department, the resident shall not be discharged if the resident has
been assessed and determined to require nursing facility services. In
contracting with nursing homes and boarding homes for enhanced adult
residential care placements, the department shall not require, by contract or
through other means, structural modifications to existing building construction.

(3)(a) The department
shall by rule establish payment rates for home and community services that
support the provision of cost-effective care. In the event of any conflict
between any such rule and a collective bargaining agreement entered into under
RCW 74.39A.270 and 74.39A.300, the collective bargaining agreement prevails.

(b) The department may
authorize an enhanced adult residential care rate for nursing homes that
temporarily or permanently convert their bed use for the purpose of providing
enhanced adult residential care under chapter 70.38 RCW, when the department
determines that payment of an enhanced rate is cost-effective and necessary to
foster expansion of contracted enhanced adult residential care services. As an
incentive for nursing homes to permanently convert a portion of its nursing
home bed capacity for the purpose of providing enhanced adult residential care,
the department may authorize a supplemental add-on to the enhanced adult
residential care rate.

(c) The department may
authorize a supplemental assisted living services rate for up to four years for
facilities that convert from nursing home use and do not retain rights to the
converted nursing home beds under chapter 70.38 RCW, if the department
determines that payment of a supplemental rate is cost-effective and necessary
to foster expansion of contracted assisted living services.

(4) In contracting
with facilities for assisted living services, adult residential care, and
enhanced adult residential care, the department will provide that its payments
to facilities will be the sole and complete payments they receive for any
services provided to the department's clients.

Sec. 2. RCW 74.46.620 and 1998 c
322 s 33 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) The department will
pay a contractor for service rendered under the facility contract and billed in
accordance with RCW 74.46.610.

(2) The amount paid
will be computed using the appropriate rates assigned to the contractor.

(3) For each recipient,
the department will pay an amount equal to the appropriate rates, multiplied by
the number of medicaid resident days each rate was in effect((, less the
amount the recipient is required to pay for his or her care as set forth by RCW
74.46.630)).

Sec. 3. RCW 74.46.630 and 1998 c
322 s 34 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) The department will
notify a contractor of the amount each medical care recipient is required to
pay for care provided under the contract and the effective date of such
required contribution. It is the ((contractor's)) department's
responsibility to collect that portion of the cost of care from the patient((,
and to account for any authorized reduction from his or her contribution in
accordance with rules established by the department)).

(2) If a contractor
receives documentation showing a change in the income or resources of a
recipient which will mean a change in his or her contribution toward the cost
of care, this shall be reported in writing to the department within seventy-two
hours and in a manner specified by rules established by the department. ((If
necessary, appropriate corrections will be made in the next facility statement,
and a copy of documentation supporting the change will be attached.)) If
increased funds for a recipient are received by ((a contractor)) the
department, an amount determined by the department shall be allowed for
clothing and personal and incidental expense, and the balance applied to the
cost of care.

(3) The contractor
shall accept the payment rates established and paid by the department as
full compensation for all services provided under the contract, certification
as specified by Title XIX, and licensure under chapter 18.51 RCW. The
contractor shall not seek or accept additional compensation from or on behalf
of a recipient for any or all such services.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 4. If any provision of this
act or its application to any person or circumstance is held invalid, the
remainder of the act or the application of the provision to other persons or
circumstances is not affected.

---
END ---