BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF
WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1. RCW 74.46.410 and 2001
1st sp.s. c 8 s 3 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) Costs will be
unallowable if they are not documented, necessary, ordinary, and related to the
provision of care services to authorized patients.

(2) Unallowable costs
include, but are not limited to, the following:

(a) Costs of items or
services not covered by the medical care program. Costs of such items or
services will be unallowable even if they are indirectly reimbursed by the
department as the result of an authorized reduction in patient contribution;

(b) Costs of services
and items provided to recipients which are covered by the department's medical
care program but not included in the medicaid per-resident day payment rate
established by the department under this chapter;

(c) Costs associated
with a capital expenditure subject to section 1122 approval (part 100, Title 42
C.F.R.) if the department found it was not consistent with applicable
standards, criteria, or plans. If the department was not given timely notice
of a proposed capital expenditure, all associated costs will be unallowable up
to the date they are determined to be reimbursable under applicable federal
regulations;

(d) Costs associated
with a construction or acquisition project requiring certificate of need
approval, or exemption from the requirements for certificate of need for the
replacement of existing nursing home beds, pursuant to chapter 70.38 RCW if
such approval or exemption was not obtained;

(e) Interest costs
other than those provided by RCW 74.46.290 on and after January 1, 1985;

(f) Salaries or other
compensation of owners, officers, directors, stockholders, partners,
principals, participants, and others associated with the contractor or its home
office, including all board of directors' fees for any purpose, except
reasonable compensation paid for service related to patient care;

(g) Costs in excess of
limits or in violation of principles set forth in this chapter;

(h) Costs resulting
from transactions or the application of accounting methods which circumvent the
principles of the payment system set forth in this chapter;

(i) Costs applicable to
services, facilities, and supplies furnished by a related organization in
excess of the lower of the cost to the related organization or the price of
comparable services, facilities, or supplies purchased elsewhere;

(j) Bad debts of
non-Title XIX recipients. Bad debts of Title XIX recipients are allowable if
the debt is related to covered services, it arises from the recipient's
required contribution toward the cost of care, the provider can establish that
reasonable collection efforts were made, the debt was actually uncollectible
when claimed as worthless, and sound business judgment established that there
was no likelihood of recovery at any time in the future;

(k) Charity and
courtesy allowances;

(l) Cash, assessments,
or other contributions, excluding dues, to charitable organizations,
professional organizations, trade associations, or political parties, and costs
incurred to improve community or public relations;

(m) Vending machine
expenses;

(n) Expenses for barber
or beautician services not included in routine care;

(o) Funeral and burial
expenses;

(p) Costs of gift shop
operations and inventory;

(q) Personal items such
as cosmetics, smoking materials, newspapers and magazines, and clothing, except
those used in patient activity programs;

(r) Fund-raising
expenses, except those directly related to the patient activity program;

(s) Penalties and fines;

(t) Expenses related to
telephones, radios, and similar appliances in patients' private accommodations;

(u) Televisions
acquired prior to July 1, 2001;

(v) Federal, state, and
other income taxes;

(w) Costs of special
care services except where authorized by the department;

(x) Expenses of an
employee benefit not in fact made available to all employees on an equal or
fair basis, for example, key-man insurance and other insurance or retirement
plans;

(y) Expenses of
profit-sharing plans;

(z) Expenses related to
the purchase and/or use of private or commercial airplanes which are in excess
of what a prudent contractor would expend for the ordinary and economic
provision of such a transportation need related to patient care;

(aa) Personal expenses
and allowances of owners or relatives;

(bb) All expenses of
maintaining professional licenses or membership in professional organizations;

(cc) Costs related to
agreements not to compete;

(dd) Amortization of
goodwill, lease acquisition, or any other intangible asset, whether related to
resident care or not, and whether recognized under generally accepted
accounting principles or not;

(ee) Expenses related
to vehicles which are in excess of what a prudent contractor would expend for
the ordinary and economic provision of transportation needs related to patient
care;

(ff) Legal and
consultant fees in connection with a fair hearing against the department where
a decision is rendered in favor of the department or where otherwise the
determination of the department stands;

(gg) Legal and
consultant fees of a contractor or contractors in connection with a lawsuit
against the department;

(hh) Lease acquisition
costs, goodwill, the cost of bed rights, or any other intangible assets;

(ii) ((All rental or
lease costs other than those provided in RCW 74.46.300 on and after January 1,
1985;

(jj))) Postsurvey charges incurred by the facility as
a result of subsequent inspections under RCW 18.51.050 which occur beyond the
first postsurvey visit during the certification survey calendar year;

(((kk))) (jj)
Compensation paid for any purchased nursing care services, including registered
nurse, licensed practical nurse, and nurse assistant services, obtained through
service contract arrangement in excess of the amount of compensation paid for
such hours of nursing care service had they been paid at the average hourly
wage, including related taxes and benefits, for in-house nursing care staff of
like classification at the same nursing facility, as reported in the most
recent cost report period;

(((ll))) (kk)
For all partial or whole rate periods after July 17, 1984, costs of land and
depreciable assets that cannot be reimbursed under the Deficit Reduction Act of
1984 and implementing state statutory and regulatory provisions;

(((mm))) (ll)
Costs reported by the contractor for a prior period to the extent such costs,
due to statutory exemption, will not be incurred by the contractor in the
period to be covered by the rate;

(((nn))) (mm)
Costs of outside activities, for example, costs allocated to the use of a
vehicle for personal purposes or related to the part of a facility leased out
for office space;

(((oo))) (nn)
Travel expenses outside the states of Idaho, Oregon, and Washington and the
province of British Columbia. However, travel to or from the home or central
office of a chain organization operating a nursing facility is allowed whether
inside or outside these areas if the travel is necessary, ordinary, and related
to resident care;

(((pp))) (oo)
Moving expenses of employees in the absence of demonstrated, good-faith effort
to recruit within the states of Idaho, Oregon, and Washington, and the province
of British Columbia;

(((qq))) (pp)
Depreciation in excess of four thousand dollars per year for each passenger car
or other vehicle primarily used by the administrator, facility staff, or
central office staff;

(((rr))) (qq)
Costs for temporary health care personnel from a nursing pool not registered
with the secretary of the department of health;

(((ss))) (rr)
Payroll taxes associated with compensation in excess of allowable compensation
of owners, relatives, and administrative personnel;

(((tt))) (ss)
Costs and fees associated with filing a petition for bankruptcy;

(((uu))) (tt)
All advertising or promotional costs, except reasonable costs of help wanted
advertising;

(((vv))) (uu)
Outside consultation expenses required to meet department-required minimum data
set completion proficiency;

(((ww))) (vv)
Interest charges assessed by any department or agency of this state for failure
to make a timely refund of overpayments and interest expenses incurred for
loans obtained to make the refunds;

(((xx))) (ww)
All home office or central office costs, whether on or off the nursing facility
premises, and whether allocated or not to specific services, in excess of the
median of those adjusted costs for all facilities reporting such costs for the
most recent report period; and

(((yy)))
(xx) Tax expenses that a nursing facility has never incurred.

--- END ---