BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF
WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1. RCW 57.08.050 and 2000 c
138 s 212 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) Subject to
subsection (5) of this section and except as public work, other than ordinary
maintenance, of a value of not more than ten percent of the public works
construction budget for the year, as expressed in a capital improvement plan
adopted by resolution of the board of commissioners, shall be performed by
employees of the district, all work ordered, the estimated cost of which is
in excess of ((five)) twenty-five thousand dollars, shall be let
by contract and competitive bidding. Before awarding any such contract the
board of commissioners shall publish a notice in a newspaper of general
circulation where the district is located at least once thirteen days before
the last date upon which bids will be received, inviting sealed proposals for
such work, plans and specifications which must at the time of publication of
such notice be on file in the office of the board of commissioners subject to
the public inspection. The notice shall state generally the work to be done
and shall call for proposals for doing the same to be sealed and filed with the
board of commissioners on or before the day and hour named therein.

Each bid shall be
accompanied by a certified or cashier's check or postal money order payable to
the order of the county treasurer for a sum not less than five percent of the
amount of the bid, or accompanied by a bid bond in an amount not less than five
percent of the bid with a corporate surety licensed to do business in the
state, conditioned that the bidder will pay the district as liquidated damages
the amount specified in the bond, unless the bidder enters into a contract in
accordance with the bidder's bid, and no bid shall be considered unless
accompanied by such check, cash or bid bond. At the time and place named such
bids shall be publicly opened and read and the board of commissioners shall
proceed to canvass the bids and may let such contract to the lowest responsible
bidder upon plans and specifications on file or to the best bidder submitting
the bidder's own plans and specifications. The board of commissioners may reject
all bids for good cause and readvertise and in such case all checks, cash or
bid bonds shall be returned to the bidders. If the contract is let, then all
checks, cash, or bid bonds shall be returned to the bidders, except that of the
successful bidder, which shall be retained until a contract shall be entered
into for doing the work, and a bond to perform such work furnished with
sureties satisfactory to the board of commissioners in the full amount of the
contract price between the bidder and the commission in accordance with the
bid. If the bidder fails to enter into the contract in accordance with the bid
and furnish the bond within ten days from the date at which the bidder is
notified that the bidder is the successful bidder, the check, cash, or bid
bonds and the amount thereof shall be forfeited to the district. If the bidder
fails to enter into a contract in accordance with the bidder's bid, and the
board of commissioners deems it necessary to take legal action to collect on
any bid bond required by this section, then the district shall be entitled to
collect from the bidder any legal expenses, including reasonable attorneys'
fees occasioned thereby. A low bidder who claims error and fails to enter into
a contract is prohibited from bidding on the same project if a second or
subsequent call for bids is made for the project.

(2) As an alternative
to requirements under subsection (1) of this section, a water-sewer district
may let contracts using the small works roster process under RCW 39.04.155.

(3) Any purchase of
materials, supplies, or equipment, with an estimated cost in excess of ten
thousand dollars, shall be by contract. Any purchase of materials, supplies,
or equipment, with an estimated cost of less than fifty thousand dollars shall
be made using the process provided in RCW 39.04.190. Any purchase of
materials, supplies, or equipment with an estimated cost of fifty thousand
dollars or more shall be made by competitive bidding following the procedure
for letting contracts for projects under subsection (1) of this section.

(4) The board may waive
the competitive bidding requirements of this section pursuant to RCW 39.04.280
if an exemption contained within that section applies to the purchase or public
work.

(5)
Whenever a water-sewer district shall, subject to the limitation expressed in
subsection (1) of this section, have public works performed by employees of the
water-sewer district during a calendar year exceeding one percent of the public
works construction budget, a report shall be prepared and made available to the
state auditor.

--- END ---