BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF
WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1. RCW 39.80.020 and 1999 c
153 s 55 are each amended to read as follows:

Unless the context
clearly requires otherwise, the definitions in this section shall apply
throughout this chapter.

(1) "State
agency" means any department, agency, commission, bureau, office, or any
other entity or authority of the state government.

(2) "Local
agency" means any city and any town, county, special district, municipal
corporation, agency, port district or authority, or political subdivision of
any type, or any other entity or authority of local government in corporate
form or otherwise.

(3) "Special
district" means a local unit of government, other than a city, town, or
county, authorized by law to perform a single function or a limited number of
functions, and including but not limited to, water-sewer districts, irrigation
districts, fire districts, school districts, community college districts,
hospital districts, transportation districts, and metropolitan municipal
corporations organized under chapter 35.58 RCW.

(4) "Agency"
means both state and local agencies and special districts as defined in
subsections (1), (2), and (3) of this section.

(5) "Architectural
and engineering services" or "professional services" means
professional services, other than professional land surveying services,
rendered by any person, other than as an employee of the agency, contracting to
perform activities within the scope of the general definition of professional
practice in chapters 18.08, 18.43, or 18.96 RCW.

(6) "Person"
means any individual, organization, group, association, partnership, firm,
joint venture, corporation, or any combination thereof.

(7)
"Consultant" means any person providing professional services who is
not an employee of the agency for which the services are provided.

(8)
"Application" means a completed statement of qualifications together
with a request to be considered for the award of one or more contracts for
professional services.

Sec. 2. RCW 39.80.040 and 1981 c
61 s 4 are each amended to read as follows:

In the
procurement of architectural and engineering services, the agency shall
encourage firms engaged in the lawful practice of their profession to submit
annually a statement of qualifications and performance data. The agency shall
evaluate current statements of qualifications and performance data on file with
the agency, together with those that may be submitted by other firms regarding
the proposed project, and shall conduct discussions with one or more firms
regarding anticipated concepts and the relative utility of alternative methods
of approach for furnishing the required services and then shall select
therefrom, based upon criteria established by the agency, ((the)) firms
deemed to be ((the most)) highly qualified to provide the services
required for the proposed project. Such agency procedures and guidelines shall
include a plan to insure that minority and women-owned firms are afforded the
maximum practicable opportunity to compete for and obtain public contracts for
services. The level of participation by minority and women-owned firms shall
be consistent with their general availability within the professional
communities involved.

Sec. 3. RCW 39.80.050 and 1981 c
61 s 5 are each amended to read as follows:

(((1))) The
agency shall negotiate a contract with ((the most)) a qualified
firm for architectural and engineering services at a price which the agency
determines is fair and reasonable to the agency. In making its determination,
the agency shall take into account the estimated value of the services to be
rendered as well as the scope, complexity, cost, and professional nature
thereof.

(((2)
If the agency is unable to negotiate a satisfactory contract with the firm
selected at a price the agency determines to be fair and reasonable,
negotiations with that firm shall be formally terminated and the agency shall
select other firms in accordance with RCW 39.80.040 and continue in accordance
with this section until an agreement is reached or the process is terminated.))

---
END ---