BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF
WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1. RCW 28A.505.210 and 2001
c 3 s 3 (Initiative Measure No. 728) are each amended to read as follows:

School districts shall
have the authority to decide the best use of student achievement funds to
assist students in meeting and exceeding the new, higher academic standards in
each district consistent with the provisions of chapter 3, Laws of 2001.

(1) Student achievement
funds shall be allocated for the following uses:

(a) To reduce class
size by hiring certificated elementary classroom teachers in grades K-4 and
paying nonemployee-related costs associated with those new teachers;

(b) To make selected
reductions in class size in grades 5-12, such as small high school writing
classes;

(c) To provide extended
learning opportunities to improve student academic achievement in grades K-12,
including, but not limited to, extended school year, extended school day,
before-and-after-school programs, special tutoring programs, weekend school
programs, summer school, and all-day kindergarten;

(d) To provide
additional professional development for educators, including additional paid
time for curriculum and lesson redesign and alignment, training to ensure that
instruction is aligned with state standards and student needs, reimbursement
for higher education costs related to enhancing teaching skills and knowledge,
and mentoring programs to match teachers with skilled, master teachers. The
funding shall not be used for salary increases or additional compensation for
existing teaching duties, but may be used for extended year and extended day
teaching contracts;

(e) To provide early
assistance for children who need prekindergarten support in order to be
successful in school;

(f) To provide
housing allowances for nonsupervisory classified and certificated public school
employees as follows:

(i) Individual
payment of the housing allowance to nonsupervisory classified and certificated
employees is subject to collective bargaining but shall be paid only to
actively employed nonsupervisory classified and certificated employees; and

(ii) The housing
allowance shall not be considered as within the definition of basic education
for the purposes of chapter 28A.150 RCW, nor is it earnable compensation as
defined in RCW 41.32.010 or compensation earnable as defined in RCW 41.40.010;
and

(g) To provide
improvements or additions to school building facilities which are directly
related to the class size reductions and extended learning opportunities under
(a) through (c) of this subsection.

(2)
Annually on or before May 1st, the school district board of directors shall
meet at the time and place designated for the purpose of a public hearing on
the proposed use of these funds to improve student achievement for the coming
year. Any person may appear or by written submission have the opportunity to
comment on the proposed plan for the use of these funds. No later than August
31st, as a part of the process under RCW 28A.505.060, each school district
shall adopt a plan for the use of these funds for the upcoming school year.
Annually, each school district shall provide to the citizens of their district
a public accounting of the funds made available to the district during the
previous school year under chapter 3, Laws of 2001, how the funds were used,
and the progress the district has made in increasing student achievement, as
measured by required state assessments and other assessments deemed appropriate
by the district. Copies of this report shall be provided to the superintendent
of public instruction and to the academic achievement and accountability
commission.

--- END ---