BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF
WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec.
1. The legislature finds
that many people visit Washington state to watch orca whales, the orca whale is
a significant symbol for the Native American culture, there are pods of orca
whales that migrate annually through Puget Sound, and the orca whale is easily
recognizable because of its distinct markings. The legislature intends to
promote orca whale awareness and to encourage protection of the natural marine
habitat by designating the orca whale as the official mammal of the state of
Washington.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
2. A new section is added
to chapter 1.20 RCW to read as follows:

The orca
whale, orcinus orca, is hereby designated as the official mammal of the
state of Washington.

---
END ---