BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF
WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1. RCW 18.52C.040 and 1997
c 392 s 528 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) The nursing pool
shall document that each temporary employee or referred independent contractor
provided or referred to health care facilities currently meets the applicable
minimum state credentialing requirements.

(2) The nursing pool
shall not require, as a condition of employment or referral, that employees or
independent contractors of the nursing pool recruit new employees or
independent contractors for the nursing pool from among the permanent employees
of the health care facility to which the nursing pool employee or independent
contractor has been assigned or referred.

(3) The nursing pool
shall carry professional and general liability insurance to insure against any
loss or damage occurring, whether professional or otherwise, as the result of
the negligence of its employees, agents or independent contractors for acts
committed in the course of their employment with the nursing pool: PROVIDED,
That a nursing pool that only refers self-employed, independent contractors to
health care facilities shall carry professional and general liability insurance
to cover its own liability as a nursing pool which refers self-employed,
independent contractors to health care facilities: AND PROVIDED FURTHER, That
it shall require, as a condition of referral, that self‑employed,
independent contractors carry professional and general liability insurance to
insure against loss or damage resulting from their own acts committed in the
course of their own employment by a health care facility.

(4) The uniform
disciplinary act, chapter 18.130 RCW, shall govern the issuance and denial of
registration and the discipline of persons registered under this chapter. The
secretary shall be the disciplinary authority under this chapter.

(5) The nursing pool
shall conduct a criminal background check on all employees and independent
contractors as required under RCW 43.43.842 prior to employment or referral of
the employee or independent contractor.

(6) The
nursing pool providing employees or referring independent contractors to a
health care facility shall not bill or receive payments from such a health care
facility at a rate higher than one hundred twenty-five percent of the weighted
average wage rate, in the county in which the health care facility is located,
for nursing home employees of like classification. Each county's weighted
average wage rate for employee classifications, which includes related taxes
and benefits, must be determined by the department of social and health
services using the median wage established by nursing home cost reports
required under chapter 74.46 RCW and hospital collective bargaining
agreements. The department of social and health services must report this data
to the secretary on an annual basis. The secretary will provide this data to
all nursing pools registered under this chapter. The maximum rate a nursing
pool may charge a health care facility must include all charges for
administrative fees, contract fees, or other special charges in addition to the
hourly rates for the nursing pool employees or referred independent contractors
supplied to the health care facility.

--- END ---