BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF
WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1. RCW 26.44.031 and 1997 c
282 s 1 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) To protect
the privacy in reporting and the maintenance of reports of nonaccidental
injury, neglect, death, sexual abuse, and cruelty to children by their parents,
and to safeguard against arbitrary, malicious, or erroneous information or
actions, the department shall not maintain information related to unfounded
referrals in files or reports of child abuse or neglect for longer than six
years except as provided in this section.

(2) At the end
of six years from receipt of the unfounded report, the information shall be
purged unless an additional report has been received in the intervening period.

(3) For
child day-care centers and family day-care providers licensed by the department
under chapter 74.15 RCW, the information shall be purged at the end of three
years from receipt of the unfounded report unless an additional report has been
received in the intervening period.

--- END ---