BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF
WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1. RCW 43.01.090 and 1998 c
105 s 5 are each amended to read as follows:

The director of general
administration may assess a charge or rent against each state board,
commission, agency, office, department, activity, or other occupant or user for
payment of a proportionate share of costs for occupancy of buildings,
structures, or facilities including but not limited to all costs of acquiring,
constructing, operating, and maintaining such buildings, structures, or
facilities and the repair, remodeling, or furnishing thereof and for the
rendering of any service or the furnishing or providing of any supplies,
equipment, or materials.

The director of general
administration may recover the full costs including appropriate overhead
charges of the foregoing by periodic billings as determined by the director
including but not limited to transfers upon accounts and advancements into the
general administration services account. Charges related to the rendering of
real estate services under RCW 43.82.010 and to the operation of nonassigned
public spaces in Thurston county shall be allocated separately from other
charges assessed under this section. Rates shall be established by the
director of general administration after consultation with the director of
financial management. The director of general administration may allot,
provide, or furnish any of such facilities, structures, services, equipment,
supplies, or materials to any other public service type occupant or user at
such rates or charges as are equitable and reasonably reflect the actual costs
of the services provided: PROVIDED, HOWEVER, That the legislature, its duly
constituted committees, interim committees and other committees shall be
exempted from the provisions of this section.

Upon receipt of such
bill, each entity, occupant, or user shall cause a warrant or check in the
amount thereof to be drawn in favor of the department of general administration
which shall be deposited in the state treasury to the credit of the general
administration services account unless the director of financial management has
authorized another method for payment of costs.

Beginning
July 1, 1995, the director of general administration shall assess a capital
projects surcharge upon each agency or other user occupying a facility owned
and managed by the department of general administration in Thurston county.
The capital projects surcharge does not apply to agencies or users that agree
to pay all future repairs, improvements, and renovations to the buildings they
occupy and a proportional share, as determined by the office of financial
management, of all other campus repairs, installations, improvements, and
renovations that provide a benefit to the buildings they occupy or that have an
agreement with the department of general administration that contains a charge
for a similar purpose, including but not limited to RCW 43.01.091, in an amount
greater than the capital projects surcharge. Beginning July 1, 2002, the
capital projects surcharge does not apply to department of services for the
blind vendors who operate cafeteria services in facilities owned and managed by
the department of general administration; the department shall consider this
space to be a common area for purposes of allocating the capital projects
surcharge to other building tenants beginning July 1, 2003. The director,
after consultation with the director of financial management, shall adopt
differential capital project surcharge rates to reflect the differences in
facility type and quality. The initial payment structure for this surcharge
shall be one dollar per square foot per year. The surcharge shall increase
over time to an amount that when combined with the facilities and service
charge equals the market rate for similar types of lease space in the area or
equals five dollars per square foot per year, whichever is less. The capital
projects surcharge shall be in addition to other charges assessed under this section.
Proceeds from the capital projects surcharge shall be deposited into the
Thurston county capital facilities account created in RCW 43.19.501.

--- END ---