BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF
WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec.
1. A new section is added
to chapter 74.46 RCW to read as follows:

Median
costs for peer groups shall be calculated initially for July 1 rate setting as
provided in this chapter on the basis of the most recent adjusted cost report
information used to set the current rates regardless of whether the adjustments
are contested or subject to pending administrative or judicial review.
Subsequently, median cost limits shall be calculated using October 31 adjusted
cost information, and shall apply retroactively to the prior July 1 rates,
regardless of whether the adjustments are contested or subject to pending
administrative or judicial review or rulings, whether final or not.

--- END ---