BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF
WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1. RCW 81.68.030 and 1989 c
163 s 4 are each amended to read as follows:

The commission is
vested with power and authority, and it is its duty to supervise and regulate
every auto transportation company in this state as provided in this section.
Under this authority, it shall for each auto transportation company:

(1) ((Fix, alter,
and amend just, fair, reasonable, and sufficient rates, fares, charges,
classifications, rules, and regulations;

(2))) Regulate the accounts, service, and safety of
operations;

(((3))) (2)
Require the filing of annual and other reports and of other data;

(((4))) (3)
Supervise and regulate the companies in all other matters affecting the
relationship between such companies and the traveling and shipping public.
However, the commission has no authority to fix, alter, amend, or approve rates,
fares, or charges for services by auto transportation companies under this
chapter;

(((5))) (4)
By general order or otherwise, prescribe rules ((and regulations)) in
conformity with this chapter, applicable to any and all such companies, and
within such limits make orders.

The
commission may, at any time, by its order duly entered after a hearing had upon
notice to the holder of any certificate under this chapter, and an opportunity
to the holder to be heard, at which it shall be proven that the holder willfully
violates or refuses to observe any of the commission's proper orders((,))
or rules, ((or regulations,)) suspend, revoke, alter, or amend
any certificate issued under the provisions of this chapter, but the holder of
the certificate has all the rights of rehearing, review, and appeal as to the
order of the commission as is provided for in RCW 81.68.070.

--- END ---