BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF
WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1. RCW 82.16.050 and 2000 c
245 s 1 are each amended to read as follows:

In computing tax there
may be deducted from the gross income the following items:

(1) Amounts derived by
municipally owned or operated public service businesses, directly from taxes
levied for the support or maintenance thereof: PROVIDED, That this section
shall not be construed to exempt service charges which are spread on the property
tax rolls and collected as taxes;

(2) Amounts derived
from the sale of commodities to persons in the same public service business as
the seller, for resale as such within this state. This deduction is allowed
only with respect to water distribution, gas distribution or other public
service businesses which furnish water, gas or any other commodity in the
performance of public service businesses;

(3) Amounts actually
paid by a taxpayer to another person taxable under this chapter as the latter's
portion of the consideration due for services furnished jointly by both, if the
total amount has been credited to and appears in the gross income reported for
tax by the former;

(4) The amount of cash
discount actually taken by the purchaser or customer;

(5) The amount of
credit losses actually sustained by taxpayers whose regular books of accounts
are kept upon an accrual basis;

(6) Amounts derived
from business which the state is prohibited from taxing under the Constitution
of this state or the Constitution or laws of the United States;

(7) Amounts derived
from the distribution of water through an irrigation system, for irrigation
purposes;

(8) Amounts derived
from the transportation of commodities from points of origin in this state to
final destination outside this state, or from points of origin outside this
state to final destination in this state, with respect to which the carrier
grants to the shipper the privilege of stopping the shipment in transit at some
point in this state for the purpose of storing, manufacturing, milling, or
other processing, and thereafter forwards the same commodity, or its
equivalent, in the same or converted form, under a through freight rate from
point of origin to final destination; and amounts derived from the transportation
of commodities from points of origin in the state to an export elevator, wharf,
dock or ship side on tidewater or navigable tributaries thereto from which such
commodities are forwarded, without intervening transportation, by vessel, in
their original form, to interstate or foreign destinations: PROVIDED, That no
deduction will be allowed when the point of origin and the point of delivery to
such an export elevator, wharf, dock, or ship side are located within the
corporate limits of the same city or town;

(9) Amounts derived
from the production, sale, or transfer of electrical energy for resale within
or outside the state or for consumption outside the state;

(10) Amounts derived
from the distribution of water by a nonprofit water association and used for
capital improvements by that nonprofit water association;

(11) Amounts paid by a
sewerage collection business taxable under RCW 82.16.020(1)(a) to a person
taxable under chapter 82.04 RCW for the treatment or disposal of sewage;

(12)
Amounts derived from the sale of compressed natural gas if: (a) The gas is
purchased for the purpose of public transportation and the purchaser is
entitled to a refund or an exemption under RCW 82.38.080(3); or (b) the gas is
purchased by a private, nonprofit transportation provider certified under
chapter 81.66 RCW and the purchaser is entitled to a refund or an exemption
under RCW 82.38.080(1)(h).

--- END ---