BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF
WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec.
1. A new section is added
to chapter 66.44 RCW to read as follows:

(1) The board shall by
rule establish a responsible vendor program. The program must include a list
of positive measures a retail licensee must take in order to be eligible for
participation in the program and prevent the sale of liquor to persons under
the age of twenty-one years. Participation in the program is voluntary and
will be open to any retail licensee.

(2) The board will
approve training programs under the responsible vendor program for employees of
retail licensees who sell liquor to members of the public. A retail licensee
may require an employee to complete an approved training program, however the
licensee must bear the cost of any fee charged the employee for participation
in the training program.

(3) If an
employee of a retail licensee makes a sale of liquor to a person under the age
of twenty-one years, and the employee has not completed an approved training
program under the responsible vendor program, the licensee may not discharge,
demote, suspend, or otherwise discriminate against the employee unless: (a)
The employee knows the person making the purchase of liquor is under the age of
twenty-one years; or (b) the employee has sold liquor to a person under the age
of twenty-one years within three years of the most recent sale.

--- END ---