BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF
WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1. RCW 90.03.380 and 2001 c
237 s 5 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) The right to the
use of water which has been applied to a beneficial use in the state shall be
and remain appurtenant to the land or place upon which the same is used:
PROVIDED, HOWEVER, That the right may be transferred to another or to others
and become appurtenant to any other land or place of use without loss of
priority of right theretofore established if such change can be made without
detriment or injury to existing rights. The point of diversion of water for
beneficial use or the purpose of use may be changed, if such change can be made
without detriment or injury to existing rights. A change in the place of use,
point of diversion, and/or purpose of use of a water right to enable irrigation
of additional acreage or the addition of new uses may be permitted if such
change results in no increase in the annual consumptive quantity of water used
under the water right. For purposes of this section, "annual consumptive
quantity" means the estimated or actual annual amount of water diverted or
withdrawn pursuant to the water right, reduced by the estimated annual
amount of return flows, ((averaged over the two years)) during the
year of greatest use within the most recent ((five-year)) fifteen-year
period of continuous beneficial use of the water right. Such an annual
consumptive quantity represents only the consumptive use portion of the amount
of water that may be spread to new or expanded uses; it does not define either
the extent of the right or the total amount of water that may be transferred or
changed to accomplish the spreading. Before any transfer of such right to
use water or change of the point of diversion of water or change of purpose of
use can be made, any person having an interest in the transfer or change, shall
file a written application therefor with the department, and the application
shall not be granted until notice of the application is published as provided
in RCW 90.03.280. If it shall appear that such transfer or such change may be
made without injury or detriment to existing rights, the department shall issue
to the applicant a certificate in duplicate granting the right for such
transfer or for such change of point of diversion or of use. The certificate
so issued shall be filed and be made a record with the department and the
duplicate certificate issued to the applicant may be filed with the county
auditor in like manner and with the same effect as provided in the original
certificate or permit to divert water.

(2) If an application
for change proposes to transfer water rights from one irrigation district to
another, the department shall, before publication of notice, receive
concurrence from each of the irrigation districts that such transfer or change
will not adversely affect the ability to deliver water to other landowners or
impair the financial integrity of either of the districts.

(3) A change in place
of use by an individual water user or users of water provided by an irrigation
district need only receive approval for the change from the board of directors
of the district if the use of water continues within the irrigation district,
and when water is provided by an irrigation entity that is a member of a board
of joint control created under chapter 87.80 RCW, approval need only be
received from the board of joint control if the use of water continues within
the area of jurisdiction of the joint board and the change can be made without
detriment or injury to existing rights.

(4) The right to use
water for any beneficial use within the general category of an agricultural use
includes the right to use the water, without applying to the department or any
other governmental entity for approval, for any other beneficial use within the
general category of an agricultural use. The general category of an agricultural
use of water includes, but is not limited to, the beneficial use of water for
stock watering, agricultural irrigation, agricultural frost control, processing
agricultural commodities into agricultural products, and other agricultural
uses.

(5) This section
shall not apply to trust water rights acquired by the state through the funding
of water conservation projects under chapter 90.38 RCW or RCW 90.42.010 through
90.42.070.

(((5))) (6)(a)
Pending applications for new water rights are not entitled to protection from
impairment, injury, or detriment when an application relating to an existing
surface or ground water right is considered.

(b) Applications
relating to existing surface or ground water rights may be processed and
decisions on them rendered independently of processing and rendering decisions
on pending applications for new water rights within the same source of supply
without regard to the date of filing of the pending applications for new water
rights.

(c) Notwithstanding any
other existing authority to process applications, including but not limited to
the authority to process applications under WAC 173-152-050 as it existed on
January 1, 2001, an application relating to an existing surface or ground water
right may be processed ahead of a previously filed application relating to an
existing right when sufficient information for a decision on the previously
filed application is not available and the applicant for the previously filed
application is sent written notice that explains what information is not
available and informs the applicant that processing of the next application
will begin. The previously filed application does not lose its priority date
and if the information is provided by the applicant within sixty days, the
previously filed application shall be processed at that time. This subsection
(((5))) (6)(c) does not affect any other existing authority to
process applications.

(d) Nothing in this
subsection (((5))) (6) is intended to stop the processing of
applications for new water rights.

(((6))) (7)(a)
No applicant for a change, transfer, or amendment of a surface or ground
water right may be required to give up any part of the applicant's valid water
right or claim to a state agency, the trust water rights program, or to other
persons as a condition of processing the application.

(((7))) (b)
The department's review of an application for change, transfer, or an amendment
of a surface or ground water right shall not include a consideration or
investigation of potential relinquishment of the water right or a portion of
the right through prior nonuse nor shall the department's receipt or review or
other consideration of such an application or its action on such an application
be cause for the department's initiation of relinquishment proceedings under
chapter 90.14 RCW for prior nonuse of the water right that is the subject of
the application.

(8) In revising
the provisions of this section and adding provisions to this section by chapter
237, Laws of 2001, the legislature does not intend to imply legislative
approval or disapproval of any existing administrative policy regarding, or any
existing administrative or judicial interpretation of, the provisions of this
section not expressly added or revised.

Sec. 2. RCW 90.14.140 and 2001 c
240 s 1, 2001 c 237 s 27, and 2001 c 69 s 5 are each reenacted and amended to
read as follows:

(1) For the purposes of
RCW 90.14.130 through 90.14.180, "sufficient cause" shall be defined
as the nonuse of all or a portion of the water by the owner of a water right
for a period of ((five)) fifteen or more consecutive years where
such nonuse occurs as a result of:

(a) Drought, or other
unavailability of water;

(b) The destruction
of works, diversions, or other facilities essential to use of the water by a
cause not within the control of the owner of the appropriation, and good faith
efforts to repair or replace the works, diversions, or facilities have been and
are being made;

(c) Nonuse occurring
during a period of time within which the exercise of all or part of the water
right was not necessary due to climatic conditions, if the water right holder
had the facility capable of handling the full allowed rate and duty, and was
otherwise ready, willing, and able to use the entire amount of water allowed
under the water right;

(d) Nonuse occurring
during a period of time within which the water was included in a pending
transfer application;

(e) Active
service in the armed forces of the United States during military crisis;

(((c))) (f)
Nonvoluntary service in the armed forces of the United States;

(((d))) (g)
The operation of legal proceedings;

(((e))) (h)
Federal or state agency leases of or options to purchase lands or water rights
which preclude or reduce the use of the right by the owner of the water right;

(((f))) (i)
Federal laws imposing land or water use restrictions either directly or through
the voluntary enrollment of a landowner in a federal program implementing those
laws, or acreage limitations, or production quotas;

(((g) Temporarily))
(j) Reduced water need for irrigation use where such reduction is due to
varying weather conditions, including but not limited to precipitation and
temperature, that warranted the reduction in water use, so long as the water
user's diversion and delivery facilities are maintained in good operating
condition consistent with beneficial use of the full amount of the water right;

(((h))) (k)
Temporarily reduced diversions or withdrawals of irrigation water directly
resulting from the provisions of a contract or similar agreement in which a
supplier of electricity buys back electricity from the water right holder and
the electricity is needed for the diversion or withdrawal or for the use of the
water diverted or withdrawn for irrigation purposes;

(((i))) (l)
Water conservation measures ((implemented under the Yakima river basin water
enhancement project, so long as the conserved water is reallocated in
accordance with the provisions of P.L. 103-434)) or improved efficiency
in distributing or using water under the right;

(((j))) (m)
Reliance by an irrigation water user on the transitory presence of return flows
in lieu of diversion or withdrawal of water from the primary source of supply,
if such return flows are measured or reliably estimated using a scientific
methodology generally accepted as reliable within the scientific community; ((or

(k))) (n) The reduced use of irrigation water
resulting from crop rotation. For purposes of this subsection, crop rotation
means the ((temporary)) short-term or long-term change in the
type of crops grown ((resulting from the exercise of generally recognized
sound farming practices)). Unused water resulting from crop rotation will
not be relinquished if the remaining portion of the water continues to be
beneficially used; or

(o) Economic
hardship that financially prevents, restricts, or hinders the ability of the
holder of the water right to use water under the right.

(2) Notwithstanding any
other provisions of RCW 90.14.130 through 90.14.180, there shall be no
relinquishment of any water right:

(a) If such right is
claimed for power development purposes under chapter 90.16 RCW and annual
license fees are paid in accordance with chapter 90.16 RCW;

(b) If such right is
used for a standby or reserve water supply to be used in time of drought or
other low flow period so long as withdrawal or diversion facilities are
maintained in good operating condition for the use of such reserve or standby
water supply;

(c) If such right is
claimed for a determined future development to take place either within fifteen
years of July 1, 1967, or the most recent beneficial use of the water right, whichever
date is later;

(d) If such right is
claimed for municipal water supply purposes under chapter 90.03 RCW;

(e) If such waters are
not subject to appropriation under the applicable provisions of RCW 90.40.030;

(f) If such right or
portion of the right is leased to another person for use on land other than the
land to which the right is appurtenant as long as the lessee makes beneficial
use of the right in accordance with this chapter and a transfer or change of
the right has been approved by the department in accordance with RCW 90.03.380,
90.03.383, 90.03.390, or 90.44.100;

(g) If such a right or
portion of the right is authorized for a purpose that is satisfied by the use
of agricultural industrial process water as authorized under RCW 90.46.150; ((or))

(h) If such right is a
trust water right under chapter 90.38 or 90.42 RCW;

(i) For a nonuse of
water during foreclosure or bankruptcy proceedings that involve the water right
authorizing the water use or involve the land to which the water right is
appurtenant; or

(j) Unless an action
is initiated by the department or is before the pollution control hearings
board or a court to relinquish the right within fifteen years of the date the
alleged nonuse of water under a right occurred, or a finding that the right or
a portion of the right has been relinquished is made by the department within
fifteen years of the date the alleged nonuse of water under a right occurred,
or a motion or order is before the pollution control hearings board or court
that would result in relinquishment within fifteen years of the date the
alleged nonuse of water under a right occurred.

(3) In adding
provisions to this section by chapter 237, Laws of 2001, the legislature does
not intend to imply legislative approval or disapproval of any existing
administrative policy regarding, or any existing administrative or judicial
interpretation of, the provisions of this section not expressly added or
revised.

Sec. 3. RCW 90.03.370 and 2000 c
98 s 3 are each amended to read as follows:

(1)(a) All
applications for reservoir permits shall be subject to the provisions of RCW
90.03.250 through 90.03.320. But the party or parties proposing to apply to a
beneficial use the water stored in any such reservoir shall also file an
application for a permit, to be known as the secondary permit, which shall be
in compliance with the provisions of RCW 90.03.250 through 90.03.320. Such
secondary application shall refer to such reservoir as its source of water
supply and shall show documentary evidence that an agreement has been entered
into with the owners of the reservoir for a permanent and sufficient interest
in said reservoir to impound enough water for the purposes set forth in said
application. When the beneficial use has been completed and perfected under
the secondary permit, the department shall take the proof of the water users
under such permit and the final certificate of appropriation shall refer to
both the ditch and works described in the secondary permit and the reservoir
described in the primary permit.

(b) The department
shall expedite processing applications for the following types of storage
proposals:

(i) Development of
storage facilities that will not require a new water right for the source of
water to be stored;

(ii) Adding or
changing one or more purposes of use of stored water;

(iii) Adding to the
storage capacity of an existing storage facility; and

(iv) Applications
for secondary permits to secure use from existing storage facilities.

(c) The following
types of storage facilities do not require a reservoir or secondary permit from
the department for the storage and use of stored water:

(i) Rain barrels,
cisterns, and other similar facilities for capturing runoff from roofs, paved
areas, and other hard surfaces on a single residential, commercial, or
industrial property or public facility when the total amount of storage does
not exceed ten thousand gallons and the water stored is intended to be put to
beneficial use;

(ii) Facilities to
recapture and reuse return flow from irrigation operations when serving a
single farm operation if the acreage irrigated is not increased beyond the
acreage allowed to be irrigated under the water right that applies to the
property;

(iii) Off-stream
ponds filled from a separate source not exceeding ten acre feet in capacity;

(iv) Excavated ponds
not filled from a separate source, but rather from interception of the water
table;

(v) Storm water
management storage facilities if no beneficial use is made of the captured
water; and

(vi) Excavated
municipal water reservoirs, water towers, and other similar facilities that are
integral to a water supply system's distribution system.

(d) The storage and
use of water from facilities described in (c) of this subsection may be
regulated by the department if necessary to prevent or remedy the impairment of
any water right or the diminishment of instream flows.

(2)(a) For the purposes
of this section, "reservoir" includes, in addition to any surface
reservoir, any naturally occurring underground geological formation where water
is collected and stored for subsequent use as part of an underground artificial
storage and recovery project. To qualify for issuance of a reservoir permit an
underground geological formation must meet standards for review and mitigation
of adverse impacts identified, for the following issues:

(i) Aquifer vulnerability
and hydraulic continuity;

(ii) Potential
impairment of existing water rights;

(iii) Geotechnical
impacts and aquifer boundaries and characteristics;

(iv) Chemical
compatibility of surface waters and ground water;

(v) Recharge and
recovery treatment requirements;

(vi) System operation;

(vii) Water rights and
ownership of water stored for recovery; and

(viii) Environmental
impacts.

(b) Standards for
review and standards for mitigation of adverse impacts for an underground
artificial storage and recovery project shall be established by the department
by rule. Notwithstanding the provisions of RCW 90.03.250 through 90.03.320,
analysis of each underground artificial storage and recovery project and each
underground geological formation for which an applicant seeks the status of a
reservoir shall be through applicant-initiated studies reviewed by the
department.

(3) For the purposes of
this section, "underground artificial storage and recovery project"
means any project in which it is intended to artificially store water in the
ground through injection, surface spreading and infiltration, or other
department-approved method, and to make subsequent use of the stored water.
However, (a) this subsection does not apply to irrigation return flow, or to
operational and seepage losses that occur during the irrigation of land, or to
water that is artificially stored due to the construction, operation, or
maintenance of an irrigation district project, or to projects involving water
reclaimed in accordance with chapter 90.46 RCW; and (b) RCW 90.44.130 applies
to those instances of claimed artificial recharge occurring due to the
construction, operation, or maintenance of an irrigation district project or
operational and seepage losses that occur during the irrigation of land, as
well as other forms of claimed artificial recharge already existing at the time
a ground water subarea is established.

(4) Nothing in chapter
98, Laws of 2000 changes the requirements of existing law governing issuance of
permits to appropriate or withdraw the waters of the state.

(5) The department
shall report to the legislature by December 31, 2001, on the standards for
review and standards for mitigation developed under subsection (3) of this
section and on the status of any applications that have been filed with the
department for underground artificial storage and recovery projects by that
date.

(6) Where needed to
ensure that existing storage capacity is effectively and efficiently used to
meet multiple purposes, the department may authorize reservoirs to be filled
more than once per year or once per season of use.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
4. A new section is added
to chapter 90.03 RCW to read as follows:

(1) The place of use
for the water right of a public water system as defined by RCW 70.119A.020(4)
is whichever of the following that provides the largest service area for the
system:

(a) The place of use
listed on the system's water right certificate or in the statements of claim
for the system's water rights filed in the state's water rights claims registry
established under RCW 90.14.111;

(b) The place of use
identified in the water system plan most recently approved by the department of
health for the system under RCW 43.20.050 or as part of a coordinated water
system plan under chapter 70.116 RCW; or

(c) The place of use
identified in the water system plan most recently submitted by the system to
the department of health for approval under RCW 43.20.050 or as part of a
coordinated water system plan under chapter 70.116 RCW.

(2) Subsection (1)(b)
and (c) of this section apply only to public water systems for which water
system plans have been submitted for approval under RCW 43.20.050 or as part of
a coordinated water system plan under chapter 70.116 RCW.

Sec. 5. RCW 90.03.015 and 1987 c
109 s 65 are each amended to read as follows:

((As used in this
chapter:)) The definitions in this section apply throughout this chapter
unless the context clearly requires otherwise.

(1)
"Department" means the department of ecology((;)).

(2)
"Director" means the director of ecology((; and)).

(3) "Municipal
water supplier" means a purveyor, as defined in RCW 70.116.030(4), that
operates a public water system with fifteen or more service connections.

(4) "Municipal
water supply purposes" means any use for which water is or is anticipated
to be provided by a municipal water supplier.

(5)
"Person" means any firm, association, water users' association,
corporation, irrigation district, or municipal corporation, as well as an
individual.

Sec. 6. RCW 90.42.080 and 2001 c
237 s 31 are each amended to read as follows:

(1)(a) The state may
acquire all or portions of existing water rights, by purchase, gift, or other
appropriate means other than by condemnation, from any person or entity or
combination of persons or entities. Once acquired, such rights are trust water
rights. A water right acquired by the state that is expressly conditioned to
limit its use to instream purposes shall be administered as a trust water right
in compliance with that condition.

(b) If an aquatic
species is listed as threatened or endangered under federal law for a body of
water, or is listed as depressed or threatened by reason of inadequate stream
flow under state law, and the holder of a right to water from the body of water
chooses to donate all or a portion of the person's water right to the trust
water system to assist in providing those instream flows on a temporary or
permanent basis, the department shall accept the donation on such terms as the
person may prescribe as long as the donation satisfies the requirements of subsection
(4) of this section and the other applicable requirements of this chapter and
the terms prescribed are relevant and material to protecting any interest in
the water right retained by the donor. Once accepted, such rights are trust
water rights within the conditions prescribed by the donor.

(2) The department may
enter into leases, contracts, or such other arrangements with other persons or
entities as appropriate, to ensure that trust water rights acquired in
accordance with this chapter may be exercised to the fullest possible extent.

(3) Trust water rights
may be acquired by the state on a temporary or permanent basis.

(4) A water right
donated under subsection (1)(b) of this section shall not exceed the extent to
which the water right was exercised during the five years before the donation
nor may the total of any portion of the water right remaining with the donor
plus the donated portion of the water right exceed the extent to which the
water right was exercised during the five years before the donation. A water
right holder who believes his or her water right has been impaired by a trust
water right donated under subsection (1)(b) of this section may request that
the department review the impairment claim. If the department determines that
exercising the trust water right resulting from the donation or exercising a
portion of that trust water right donated under subsection (1)(b) of this
section is impairing existing water rights in violation of RCW 90.42.070, the
trust water right shall be altered by the department to eliminate the
impairment. Any decision of the department to alter or not to alter a trust
water right donated under subsection (1)(b) of this section is appealable to
the pollution control hearings board under RCW 43.21B.230. A donated water
right's status as a trust water right under this subsection is not evidence of
the validity or quantity of the water right.

(5) The provisions of
RCW 90.03.380 and 90.03.390 do not apply to donations for instream flows
described in subsection (1)(b) of this section, but do apply to other transfers
of water rights under this section.

(6) No funds may be
expended for the purchase of water rights by the state pursuant to this section
unless specifically appropriated for this purpose by the legislature.

(7) Any water right
conveyed to the trust water right system as a gift that is expressly
conditioned to limit its use to instream purposes shall be managed by the
department for public purposes to ensure that it qualifies as a gift that is
deductible for federal income taxation purposes for the person or entity
conveying the water right.

(8) If the department
acquires a trust water right by lease in an area in which a drought order has
been issued under RCW 43.83B.405 and is in effect at the time the department
leases the water right, the amount of the trust water right shall not exceed
the extent to which the water right was exercised during the five years before
the acquisition was made nor may the total of any portion of the water right
remaining with the original water right holder plus the portion of the water
right leased by the department exceed the extent to which the water right was
exercised during the five years before the acquisition. A water right holder
who believes his or her water right has been impaired by a trust water right
leased under this subsection may request that the department review the
impairment claim. If the department determines that exercising the trust water
right resulting from the leasing or exercising (([of])) of a
portion of that trust water right leased under this subsection is impairing
existing water rights in violation of RCW 90.42.070, the trust water right
shall be altered by the department to eliminate the impairment. Any decision
of the department to alter or not to alter a trust water right leased under
this subsection is appealable to the pollution control hearings board under RCW
43.21B.230. The department's leasing of a trust water right under this
subsection is not evidence of the validity or quantity of the water right.

(9) For a water right
donated to or acquired by the trust water rights program on a temporary basis,
the full quantity of water diverted or withdrawn to exercise the right before
the donation or acquisition shall be placed in the trust water rights program
and shall revert to the donor or person from whom it was acquired when the
trust period ends.

(10) The procedures
identified in subsection (1)(b) of this section for donations and identified in
subsection (8) of this section for leases also apply to donations or leases of
existing water rights where:

(a) Existing water
rights related to agriculture are donated or leased to preserve the opportunity
for future agricultural use and to enhance instream flows temporarily; or

(b) Existing water
rights acquired for the purpose of providing water supply to industrial lands
as designated in a land use plan adopted under chapter 36.70A RCW are donated
or leased to preserve the opportunity for future industrial use and to enhance
instream flows temporarily.

Sec. 7. RCW 90.38.020 and 2001 c
237 s 28 are each amended to read as follows:

(1)(a) The department
may acquire water rights, including but not limited to storage rights, by
purchase, lease, gift, or other appropriate means other than by condemnation,
from any person or entity or combination of persons or entities. Once
acquired, such rights are trust water rights. A water right acquired by the
state that is expressly conditioned to limit its use to instream purposes shall
be administered as a trust water right in compliance with that condition.

(b) If an aquatic
species is listed as threatened or endangered under federal law for a body of
water, or is listed as depressed or threatened by reason of inadequate stream
flows under state law, and the holder of a right to water from the body of
water chooses to donate all or a portion of the person's water right to the
trust water system to assist in providing those instream flows on a temporary
or permanent basis, the department shall accept the donation on such terms as
the person may prescribe as long as the donation satisfies the requirements of
subsection (4) of this section and the other applicable requirements of this
chapter and the terms prescribed are relevant and material to protecting any
interest in the water right retained by the donor. Once accepted, such rights
are trust water rights within the conditions prescribed by the donor.

(2) The department may
make such other arrangements, including entry into contracts with other persons
or entities as appropriate to ensure that trust water rights acquired in
accordance with this chapter can be exercised to the fullest possible extent.

(3) The trust water
rights may be acquired on a temporary or permanent basis.

(4) A water right
donated under subsection (1)(b) of this section shall not exceed the extent to
which the water right was exercised during the five years before the donation
nor may the total of any portion of the water right remaining with the donor
plus the donated portion of the water right exceed the extent to which the
water right was exercised during the five years before the donation. A water
right holder who believes his or her water right has been impaired by a trust
water right donated under subsection (1)(b) of this section may request that
the department review the impairment claim. If the department determines that
exercising the trust water right resulting from the donation or exercising a
portion of that trust water right donated under subsection (1)(b) of this
section is impairing existing water rights in violation of RCW 90.38.902, the
trust water right shall be altered by the department to eliminate the
impairment. Any decision of the department to alter or not alter a trust water
right donated under subsection (1)(b) of this section is appealable to the
pollution control hearings board under RCW 43.21B.230. A donated water right's
status as a trust water right under this subsection is not evidence of the
validity or quantity of the water right.

(5) Any water right
conveyed to the trust water right system as a gift that is expressly
conditioned to limit its use to instream purposes shall be managed by the
department for public purposes to ensure that it qualifies as a gift that is
deductible for federal income taxation purposes for the person or entity
conveying the water right.

(6) If the department
acquires a trust water right by lease in an area in which a drought order has
been issued under RCW 43.83B.405 and is in effect at the time the department
leases the water right, the amount of the trust water right shall not exceed
the extent to which the water right was exercised during the five years before
the acquisition was made nor may the total of any portion of the water right
remaining with the original water right holder plus the portion of the water
right leased by the department exceed the extent to which the water right was
exercised during the five years before the acquisition. A water right holder
who believes his or her water right has been impaired by a trust water right
leased under this subsection may request that the department review the
impairment claim. If the department determines that exercising the trust water
right resulting from the leasing or exercising (([of])) of a
portion of that trust water right leased under this subsection is impairing
existing water rights in violation of RCW 90.38.902, the trust water right shall
be altered by the department to eliminate the impairment. Any decision of the
department to alter or not to alter a trust water right leased under this
subsection is appealable to the pollution control hearings board under RCW
43.21B.230. The department's leasing of a trust water right under this
subsection is not evidence of the validity or quantity of the water right.

(7) For a water right
donated to or acquired by the trust water rights program on a temporary basis,
the full quantity of water diverted or withdrawn to exercise the right before
the donation or acquisition shall be placed in the trust water rights program
and shall revert to the donor or person from whom it was acquired when the
trust period ends.

(8) The procedures
identified in subsection (1)(b) of this section for donations and identified in
subsection (6) of this section for leases shall also apply to donations or
leases of existing water rights where:

(a) Existing water
rights related to agriculture are donated or leased to preserve the opportunity
for future agricultural use and to enhance instream flows temporarily; or

(b) Existing water
rights acquired for the purpose of providing water supply to industrial lands
as designated in a land use plan adopted under chapter 36.70A RCW are donated
or leased to preserve the opportunity for future industrial use and to enhance
instream flows temporarily.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
8. The legislature finds
that the state has a significant need to provide a reliable water supply for
people, farms, and fish, and that this can be accomplished through such
activities as the construction of multiple purpose water storage facilities,
and the leasing of water.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
9. A new section is added
to chapter 90.03 RCW to read as follows:

The water for
agriculture, salmon, and humans account is hereby created in the state
treasury. The moneys in this account shall only be used for activities that
develop water storage projects for multiple purposes, lease water, ensure safe
drinking water, increase municipal and agricultural water conservation, promote
water reuse, and to implement projects developed through locally based
watershed planning. All interest earnings on moneys deposited into the
account, including loan repayments, shall remain in the account and may be used
for eligible purposes. Moneys in the account may be spent only after
appropriation.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
10. A new section is added
to chapter 90.03 RCW to read as follows:

(1) The proceeds from
the sale of bonds authorized by this chapter shall be deposited into the water
for agriculture, salmon, and humans account created in section 9 of this act
unless otherwise specified below. These funds shall be appropriated by the
legislature as follows:

(a) Fifty percent of
the funding shall be used for water storage and conveyance projects for
multiple instream and out-of-stream purposes. For this purpose, funding for a
water storage facility that is within the distribution works of a public water
system and within an incorporated area or within an area designated as an urban
growth area under chapter 36.70A RCW shall be considered funding for a drinking
water system and not funding that applies to the fifty percent dedicated by
this subsection (1)(a). The department shall establish criteria for a grant
and loan program for the construction, planning, design, and studies necessary
for water storage and conveyance projects. The department shall contract with
the public works board created under RCW 43.155.030 to administer these grants
and loans;

(b) Twenty-five percent
of the funding shall be deposited into the public works assistance account
under chapter 43.155 RCW and shall be used for safe drinking water and
reclaimed water projects;

(c) Ten percent of the
funding shall be used for agricultural water conservation projects and instream
flows;

(d) Seven and one-half
percent of the funding shall be used to lease water to meet instream flow
levels needed by fish; and

(e) Seven and one-half
percent of the funding shall be used for implementing projects developed
through the watershed planning process authorized under chapter 90.82 RCW.

(2) The percentage of
the local funding for a capital project that is required under this section to
receive state funding shall be the same for all types and categories of capital
projects.

(3) If an agricultural
water conservation project is provided funding under this section and in
consideration thereof a portion of the water available under a water right
involved in the project is to be transferred or otherwise dedicated to the
state, the transfer or dedication shall be in the form of a lease of water for
a period that is not more than the period during which the elements of the
conservation project are estimated to operate effectively and efficiently. The
quantity of water transferred or dedicated to the state expressed as a
percentage of the total water available under the right before the transfer or
dedication shall not exceed the percentage of the total cost of the
conservation project represented by the funds provided by the state for the
conservation project.

(4) The legislature may
authorize expenditures from the water for agriculture, salmon, and humans
account to pay for the costs of establishing and administering the water
infrastructure programs described in subsection (1) of this section. The
amount of funding dedicated to this purpose shall not exceed one percent of the
total amount of bonds sold in any calendar year. These funds may be used to
define technical and financial program requirements, such as grant and loan
criteria, to solicit, review, and award funds, and to monitor performance, make
payments, and conduct other administrative activities.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
11. A new section is added
to chapter 90.03 RCW to read as follows:

The legislature shall
appropriate any moneys that are provided under section 10 of this act for
capital projects, including planning, engineering, and other studies for such
projects, to the public works board created under RCW 43.155.030. Before
November 1st of each year, the board shall develop and submit to the governor
and the legislature a prioritized list of projects that are recommended for
funding by the legislature under this section. The board shall approve and
disburse grants and loans for such projects from appropriations made under this
section.

Sec. 12. RCW 43.84.092 and 2001
2nd sp.s. c 14 s 608, 2001 c 273 s 6, 2001 c 141 s 3, and 2001 c 80 s 5 are
each reenacted and amended to read as follows:

(1) All earnings of
investments of surplus balances in the state treasury shall be deposited to the
treasury income account, which account is hereby established in the state
treasury.

(2) The treasury income
account shall be utilized to pay or receive funds associated with federal
programs as required by the federal cash management improvement act of 1990.
The treasury income account is subject in all respects to chapter 43.88 RCW,
but no appropriation is required for refunds or allocations of interest
earnings required by the cash management improvement act. Refunds of interest
to the federal treasury required under the cash management improvement act fall
under RCW 43.88.180 and shall not require appropriation. The office of
financial management shall determine the amounts due to or from the federal
government pursuant to the cash management improvement act. The office of
financial management may direct transfers of funds between accounts as deemed
necessary to implement the provisions of the cash management improvement act,
and this subsection. Refunds or allocations shall occur prior to the
distributions of earnings set forth in subsection (4) of this section.

(3) Except for the
provisions of RCW 43.84.160, the treasury income account may be utilized for
the payment of purchased banking services on behalf of treasury funds
including, but not limited to, depository, safekeeping, and disbursement
functions for the state treasury and affected state agencies. The treasury
income account is subject in all respects to chapter 43.88 RCW, but no
appropriation is required for payments to financial institutions. Payments
shall occur prior to distribution of earnings set forth in subsection (4) of
this section.

(4) Monthly, the state
treasurer shall distribute the earnings credited to the treasury income
account. The state treasurer shall credit the general fund with all the
earnings credited to the treasury income account except:

(a) The following
accounts and funds shall receive their proportionate share of earnings based
upon each account's and fund's average daily balance for the period: The
capitol building construction account, the Cedar River channel construction and
operation account, the Central Washington University capital projects account,
the charitable, educational, penal and reformatory institutions account, the
common school construction fund, the county criminal justice assistance
account, the county sales and use tax equalization account, the data processing
building construction account, the deferred compensation administrative
account, the deferred compensation principal account, the department of
retirement systems expense account, the drinking water assistance account, the
drinking water assistance administrative account, the drinking water assistance
repayment account, the Eastern Washington University capital projects account,
the education construction fund, the emergency reserve fund, the federal forest
revolving account, the health services account, the public health services
account, the health system capacity account, the personal health services
account, the state higher education construction account, the higher education
construction account, the highway infrastructure account, the industrial
insurance premium refund account, the judges' retirement account, the judicial
retirement administrative account, the judicial retirement principal account,
the local leasehold excise tax account, the local real estate excise tax
account, the local sales and use tax account, the medical aid account, the
mobile home park relocation fund, the multimodal transportation account, the
municipal criminal justice assistance account, the municipal sales and use tax
equalization account, the natural resources deposit account, the oyster reserve
land account, the perpetual surveillance and maintenance account, the public
employees' retirement system plan 1 account, the public employees' retirement
system combined plan 2 and plan 3 account, the public health supplemental
account, the Puyallup tribal settlement account, the resource management cost
account, the site closure account, the special wildlife account, the state
employees' insurance account, the state employees' insurance reserve account,
the state investment board expense account, the state investment board
commingled trust fund accounts, the supplemental pension account, the teachers'
retirement system plan 1 account, the teachers' retirement system combined plan
2 and plan 3 account, the tobacco prevention and control account, the tobacco
settlement account, the transportation infrastructure account, the tuition
recovery trust fund, the University of Washington bond retirement fund, the
University of Washington building account, the volunteer fire fighters' and
reserve officers' relief and pension principal fund, the volunteer fire
fighters' and reserve officers' administrative fund, the Washington fruit
express account, the Washington judicial retirement system account, the
Washington law enforcement officers' and fire fighters' system plan 1
retirement account, the Washington law enforcement officers' and fire fighters'
system plan 2 retirement account, the Washington school employees' retirement
system combined plan 2 and 3 account, the Washington state health insurance
pool account, the Washington state patrol retirement account, the Washington
State University building account, the Washington State University bond
retirement fund, the water for agriculture, salmon, and humans account,
the water pollution control revolving fund, and the Western Washington
University capital projects account. Earnings derived from investing balances
of the agricultural permanent fund, the normal school permanent fund, the
permanent common school fund, the scientific permanent fund, and the state
university permanent fund shall be allocated to their respective beneficiary
accounts. All earnings to be distributed under this subsection (4)(a) shall first
be reduced by the allocation to the state treasurer's service fund pursuant to
RCW 43.08.190.

(b) The following
accounts and funds shall receive eighty percent of their proportionate share of
earnings based upon each account's or fund's average daily balance for the
period: The aeronautics account, the aircraft search and rescue account, the
county arterial preservation account, the department of licensing services
account, the essential rail assistance account, the ferry bond retirement fund,
the grade crossing protective fund, the high capacity transportation account,
the highway bond retirement fund, the highway safety account, the motor vehicle
fund, the motorcycle safety education account, the pilotage account, the public
transportation systems account, the Puget Sound capital construction account,
the Puget Sound ferry operations account, the recreational vehicle account, the
rural arterial trust account, the safety and education account, the special
category C account, the state patrol highway account, the transportation
equipment fund, the transportation fund, the transportation improvement account,
the transportation improvement board bond retirement account, and the urban
arterial trust account.

(5) In conformance with
Article II, section 37 of the state Constitution, no treasury accounts or funds
shall be allocated earnings without the specific affirmative directive of this
section.

Sec. 13. RCW 90.44.050 and 1987 c
109 s 108 are each amended to read as follows:

After June 6, 1945, no
withdrawal of public ground waters of the state shall be begun, nor shall any
well or other works for such withdrawal be constructed, unless an application
to appropriate such waters has been made to the department and a permit has
been granted by it ((as herein)) provided((: EXCEPT, HOWEVER, That))
in this section. The following uses are exempt from this section, to the
extent that the uses are regularly used beneficially, and are entitled to a
right equal to that established by a permit issued under this chapter:

(1) Any
withdrawal of public ground waters for stock-watering purposes((, or for));

(2) Any withdrawal
of public ground waters in an amount not exceeding five thousand gallons a day
for:

(a) The watering
of a lawn; or

(b) The watering
of a noncommercial garden not exceeding one-half acre in area((,));
or ((for))

(c) Single or
group domestic uses ((in an amount not exceeding five thousand gallons a
day,)); or ((for))

(d) An
industrial purpose ((in an amount not exceeding five thousand gallons a day,
is and shall be exempt from the provisions of this section, but, to the extent
that it is regularly used beneficially, shall be entitled to a right equal to
that established by a permit issued under the provisions of this chapter:
PROVIDED, HOWEVER, That)). However, the department from time to
time may require the person or agency making any such small withdrawal to
furnish information as to the means for and the quantity of that withdrawal((:
PROVIDED, FURTHER, That)), but the department does not have authority to
require the metering or measuring of the withdrawals authorized in this
section. At the option of the party making withdrawals of ground waters of
the state not exceeding five thousand gallons per day, applications under this
section or declarations under RCW 90.44.090 may be filed and permits and
certificates obtained in the same manner and under the same requirements as is
in this chapter provided in the case of withdrawals in excess of five thousand
gallons a day.

Sec. 14. RCW 90.14.160 and 1981 c
291 s 1 are each amended to read as follows:

Any person entitled to
divert or withdraw waters of the state through any appropriation authorized by
enactments of the legislature prior to enactment of chapter 117, Laws of 1917,
or by custom, or by general adjudication, who abandons the same, or who
voluntarily fails, without sufficient cause, to beneficially use all or any
part of said right to divert or withdraw for any period of ((five)) fifteen
successive years after July 1, 1967, shall relinquish such right or portion
thereof, and said right or portion thereof shall revert to the state, after
a process providing due process in accordance with RCW 90.14.130 and not at the
time of the nonuse, and the waters affected by said right shall become
available for appropriation in accordance with RCW 90.03.250.

Sec. 15. RCW 90.14.170 and 1967 c
233 s 17 are each amended to read as follows:

Any person entitled to
divert or withdraw waters of the state by virtue of his ownership of land
abutting a stream, lake, or watercourse, who abandons the same, or who
voluntarily fails, without sufficient cause, to beneficially use all or any
part of said right to withdraw or divert said water for any period of ((five))
fifteen successive years after July 1, 1967, shall relinquish such right
or portion thereof, and such right or portion thereof shall revert to the
state, and the waters affected by said right shall become available for
appropriation in accordance with the provisions of RCW 90.03.250.

Sec. 16. RCW 90.14.180 and 1987 c
109 s 101 are each amended to read as follows:

Any person hereafter
entitled to divert or withdraw waters of the state through an appropriation
authorized under RCW 90.03.330, 90.44.080, or 90.44.090 who abandons the same,
or who voluntarily fails, without sufficient cause, to beneficially use all or
any part of said right to withdraw for any period of ((five)) fifteen
successive years shall relinquish such right or portion thereof, and such right
or portion thereof shall revert to the state, and the waters affected by said
right shall become available for appropriation in accordance with RCW
90.03.250. All certificates hereafter issued by the department of ecology
pursuant to RCW 90.03.330 shall expressly incorporate this section by
reference. Such relinquishment occurs after a process providing due process
in accordance with RCW 90.14.130 and not at the time of the nonuse.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
17. A new section is added
to chapter 90.14 RCW to read as follows:

To determine the
measurement for beneficial use, there must be at least five years of use within
the last fifteen years. Of these five years of use within the last fifteen
years, the one year with the largest volume is the beneficial use amount.

Sec. 18. RCW 90.44.100 and 1997 c
316 s 2 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) After an
application to, and upon the issuance by the department of an amendment to the
appropriate permit or certificate of ground water right, the holder of a valid
right to withdraw public ground waters may, without losing the holder's
priority of right, construct wells or other means of withdrawal at a new
location in substitution for or in addition to those at the original location,
or the holder may change the ((manner)) purpose or the place of
use of the water.

(2) An amendment to
construct replacement or a new additional well or wells at a location outside
of the location of the original well or wells or to change the ((manner))
purpose or place of use of the water shall be issued only after
publication of notice of the application and findings as prescribed in the case
of an original application. Such amendment shall be issued by the department
only on the conditions that: (a) The additional or replacement well or wells
shall tap the same body of public ground water as the original well or wells;
(b) where a replacement well or wells is approved, the use of the original well
or wells shall be discontinued and the original well or wells shall be properly
decommissioned as required under chapter 18.104 RCW; (c) where an additional
well or wells is constructed, the original well or wells may continue to be
used, but the combined total withdrawal from the original and additional well
or wells shall not enlarge by increasing the annual consumptive quantity of
the right conveyed by the original permit or certificate; and (d) other
existing rights shall not be impaired. The department may specify an approved
manner of construction and shall require a showing of compliance with the terms
of the amendment, as provided in RCW 90.44.080 in the case of an original
permit.

(3) The construction of
a replacement or new additional well or wells at the location of the original
well or wells shall be allowed without application to the department for an
amendment. However, the following apply to such a replacement or new
additional well: (a) The well shall tap the same body of public ground water
as the original well or wells; (b) if a replacement well is constructed, the
use of the original well or wells shall be discontinued and the original well
or wells shall be properly decommissioned as required under chapter 18.104 RCW;
(c) if a new additional well is constructed, the original well or wells may continue
to be used, but the combined total withdrawal from the original and additional
well or wells shall not enlarge the right conveyed by the original water use
permit or certificate; (d) the construction and use of the well shall not
interfere with or impair water rights with an earlier date of priority than the
water right or rights for the original well or wells; (e) the replacement or
additional well shall be located no closer than the original well to a well it
might interfere with; (f) the department may specify an approved manner of
construction of the well; and (g) the department shall require a showing of
compliance with the conditions of this subsection (3).

(4) A certificate
issued by the department under this chapter may not be revoked or diminished
without specific statutory direction to do so unless:

(a) The water right
represented by the certificate has been relinquished under chapter 90.14 RCW
and the revocation or diminishment represents that relinquishment; or

(b) The certificate
was issued with ministerial errors or was obtained through the
misrepresentation of the completion of the project or the quantity
appropriated. The department may adjust a certificate under this subsection
(4)(b) if ministerial errors are discovered, but only to the extent necessary
to correct the ministerial errors, and it may revoke a certificate or diminish
the right represented by a certificate if the certificate has been obtained
through such a misrepresentation. However, the authority provided by this subsection
(4) does not include revoking, diminishing, or adjusting a certificate based on
any change in policy regarding the issuance of such certificates occurring
since the certificate was issued except as specifically directed by statute.

(5) As used in this
section, the "location of the original well or wells" is the area
described as the point of withdrawal in the original public notice published
for the application for the water right for the well.

(6) The right to use
water for any beneficial use within the general category of an agricultural use
includes the right to use the water, without applying to the department or any
other governmental entity for approval, for any other beneficial use within the
general category of an agricultural use. The general category of an
agricultural use of water includes, but is not limited to, the beneficial use
of water for stock watering, agricultural irrigation, agricultural frost
control, processing agricultural commodities into agricultural products, and
other agricultural uses.

Sec. 19. RCW 90.03.330 and 1987 c
109 s 89 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) Upon a
showing satisfactory to the department that any appropriation has been
perfected in accordance with the provisions of this chapter, it shall be the
duty of the department to issue to the applicant a certificate stating such
facts in a form to be prescribed by him, and such certificate shall thereupon
be recorded with the department. Any original water right certificate issued,
as provided by this chapter, shall be recorded with the department and
thereafter, at the expense of the party receiving the same, be by the
department transmitted to the county auditor of the county or counties where
the distributing system or any part thereof is located, and be recorded in the
office of such county auditor, and thereafter be transmitted to the owner
thereof.

(2) A certificate
issued by the department under this chapter may not be revoked or diminished
without specific statutory direction to do so unless:

(a) The water right
represented by the certificate has been relinquished under chapter 90.14 RCW
and the revocation or diminishment represents that relinquishment; or

(b) The
certificate was issued with ministerial errors or was obtained through the
misrepresentation of the completion of the project or the quantity
appropriated. The department may adjust a certificate under this subsection
(2)(b) if ministerial errors are discovered, but only to the extent necessary
to correct the ministerial errors, and it may revoke a certificate or diminish
the right represented by a certificate if the certificate has been obtained
through such a misrepresentation. However, the authority provided by this
subsection (2) does not include revoking, diminishing, or adjusting a
certificate based on any change in policy regarding the issuance of such
certificates occurring since the certificate was issued except as specifically
directed by statute.

---
END ---