BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF
WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec.
1. The nursing home
committee is hereby created.

(1) Membership of the
committee shall include fifteen members, four of whom shall be legislators.
The president of the senate shall appoint two members of the senate, one from
the majority caucus and one from the minority caucus. The speaker of the house
of representatives shall appoint two members of the house of representatives,
one from the majority caucus and one from the minority caucus. The remaining
members shall be appointed by the governor and shall include: Two
representatives of statewide nursing home associations, two nursing home
operators nominated by statewide nursing home associations, four members of the
public, one member representing the department of social and health services,
one person representing the governor, and one person representing unionized
employees of a nursing home.

(2) The nursing home
committee shall review all state and federal statutes and rules governing the
operation of nursing homes and shall identify:

(a) Areas of redundancy
and duplication;

(b) Opportunities for
greater efficiency; and

(c) Opportunities to
shift the focus of regulation to a collaborative, consultative process.

(3) The nursing home
committee shall report its findings and recommendations to the governor and the
appropriate committees of the senate and house of representatives no later than
September 15, 2004.

(4) The
nursing home committee shall cease to exist on December 31, 2004.

---
END ---