BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF
WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1. RCW 9.46.295 and 1974
ex.s. c 155 s 6 are each amended to read as follows:

Any
license to engage in any of the gambling activities authorized by this chapter
as now exists or as hereafter amended, and issued under the authority thereof
shall be legal authority to engage in the gambling activities for which issued
throughout the incorporated and unincorporated area of any county, except that
a city located therein with respect to that city, or a county with respect to
all areas within that county except for such cities, may absolutely prohibit,
but may not change the scope of license, any or all of the gambling activities
for which the license was issued. Nothing in this chapter limits the
authority of any city, town, city-county, or county to exercise its land use
and zoning powers granted or recognized under the law with respect to any land
uses involving gambling activities authorized under this chapter.

--- END ---