BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF
WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1. RCW 49.46.020 and 1999 c
1 s 1 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) ((Until January
1, 1999, every employer shall pay to each of his or her employees who has
reached the age of eighteen years wages at a rate of not less than four dollars
and ninety cents per hour.

(2) Beginning
January 1, 1999, and until January 1, 2000, every employer shall pay to each of
his or her employees who has reached the age of eighteen years wages at a rate
of not less than five dollars and seventy cents per hour.

(3) Beginning
January 1, 2000, and until January 1, 2001, every employer shall pay to each of
his or her employees who has reached the age of eighteen years wages at a rate
of not less than six dollars and fifty cents per hour.

(4)(a) Beginning on
January 1, 2001, and each following))
(a) On January 1st as set forth under (b) of this subsection, every
employer shall pay to each of his or her employees who has reached the age of
eighteen years wages at a rate of not less than the amount established under
(b) of this subsection.

(b) On ((September
30, 2000, and on each following)) September 30th, the department of labor
and industries shall calculate an adjusted minimum wage rate to maintain
employee purchasing power by increasing the current year's minimum wage rate by
the rate of inflation. The adjusted minimum wage rate shall be calculated to
the nearest cent using the consumer price index for urban wage earners and
clerical workers, CPI-W, or a successor index, for the twelve months prior to
each September 1st as calculated by the United States department of labor.
Each adjusted minimum wage rate calculated under this subsection (((4)))
(1)(b) takes effect on the following January 1st.

(((5))) (2)
The ((director shall by regulation establish the)) minimum wage for
employees under the age of eighteen years and employees who have been
employed by the employer for less than one hundred twenty days equals eighty
percent of the adjusted minimum wage rate calculated under subsection (1)(b) of
this section.

--- END ---