BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF
WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1. RCW 90.14.140 and 2001 c
240 s 1, 2001 c 237 s 27, and 2001 c 69 s 5 are each reenacted and amended to
read as follows:

(1) For the purposes of
RCW 90.14.130 through 90.14.180, "sufficient cause" shall be defined
as the nonuse of all or a portion of the water by the owner of a water right
for a period of five or more consecutive years where such nonuse occurs as a
result of:

(a) Drought, or other
unavailability of water;

(b) Active service in
the armed forces of the United States during military crisis;

(c) Nonvoluntary
service in the armed forces of the United States;

(d) The operation of
legal proceedings;

(e) Federal or state
agency leases of or options to purchase lands or water rights which preclude or
reduce the use of the right by the owner of the water right;

(f) Federal laws
imposing land or water use restrictions either directly or through the
voluntary enrollment of a landowner in a federal program implementing those
laws, or acreage limitations, or production quotas;

(g) Temporarily reduced
water need for irrigation use where such reduction is due to varying weather
conditions, including but not limited to precipitation and temperature, that
warranted the reduction in water use, so long as the water user's diversion and
delivery facilities are maintained in good operating condition consistent with
beneficial use of the full amount of the water right;

(h) Temporarily reduced
diversions or withdrawals of irrigation water directly resulting from the
provisions of a contract or similar agreement in which a supplier of
electricity buys back electricity from the water right holder and the
electricity is needed for the diversion or withdrawal or for the use of the
water diverted or withdrawn for irrigation purposes;

(i) Water conservation
measures implemented under the Yakima river basin water enhancement project, so
long as the conserved water is reallocated in accordance with the provisions of
P.L. 103-434;

(j) Reliance by an
irrigation water user on the transitory presence of return flows in lieu of
diversion or withdrawal of water from the primary source of supply, if such
return flows are measured or reliably estimated using a scientific methodology
generally accepted as reliable within the scientific community; or

(k) The reduced use of
irrigation water resulting from crop rotation. For purposes of this
subsection, crop rotation means the temporary change in the type of crops grown
resulting from the exercise of generally recognized sound farming practices.
Unused water resulting from crop rotation will not be relinquished if the
remaining portion of the water continues to be beneficially used.

(2) Notwithstanding any
other provisions of RCW 90.14.130 through 90.14.180, there shall be no
relinquishment of any water right:

(a) If such right is
claimed for power development purposes under chapter 90.16 RCW and annual
license fees are paid in accordance with chapter 90.16 RCW;

(b) If such right is
used for a standby or reserve water supply to be used in time of drought or
other low flow period so long as withdrawal or diversion facilities are
maintained in good operating condition for the use of such reserve or standby
water supply;

(c) If such right is
claimed for a determined future development to take place either within fifteen
years of July 1, 1967, or the most recent beneficial use of the water right,
whichever date is later;

(d) If such right is
claimed for municipal water supply purposes under chapter 90.03 RCW;

(e) If such waters are
not subject to appropriation under the applicable provisions of RCW 90.40.030;

(f) If such right or
portion of the right is leased to another person for use on land other than the
land to which the right is appurtenant as long as the lessee makes beneficial
use of the right in accordance with this chapter and a transfer or change of
the right has been approved by the department in accordance with RCW 90.03.380,
90.03.383, 90.03.390, or 90.44.100;

(g) If such a right or
portion of the right is authorized for a purpose that is satisfied by the use
of agricultural industrial process water as authorized under RCW 90.46.150; ((or))

(h) If such right is a
trust water right under chapter 90.38 or 90.42 RCW; or

(i) If such right is
authorized for any instream beneficial use of water.

(3) In
adding provisions to this section by chapter 237, Laws of 2001, the legislature
does not intend to imply legislative approval or disapproval of any existing
administrative policy regarding, or any existing administrative or judicial
interpretation of, the provisions of this section not expressly added or
revised.

--- END ---