BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF
WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec.
1. A new section is added
to chapter 29.79 RCW to read as follows:

The legislature
recognizes that through the initiative process, voters play an increasing role
in setting statewide legislative policy and adopting new laws. In exercising
this authority, voters in this state deserve to have sufficient information to
make educated decisions. The Washington state supreme court recognized that a
significant number of voters make decisions on initiatives based merely upon
the information provided in the ballot. Therefore, the ballot should provide
voters with the information they need to evaluate the impacts of their
decision, just as the legislature educates its own decisions through fiscal
notes under chapter 43.88A RCW. The legislature finds that the voters of the
state have a particular interest in understanding their decisions' impacts on
existing government services and programs. This is best accomplished by
preparing a fiscal impact statement and providing voters with a "notice of
probable impacts," which summarizes the fiscal impact statement and shall
be displayed on ballots directly beneath the ballot title.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
2. A new section is added
to chapter 29.79 RCW to read as follows:

The office of financial
management, in consultation with the secretary of state, the department of
revenue, other state agencies, selected local governments and associations of
local governments, and legislative fiscal staff, when appropriate, shall
prepare a fiscal impact statement for each initiative to the people certified
for the ballot under RCW 29.79.230. Each fiscal impact statement must describe
any projected increases or decreases in revenues, costs, expenditures, or
indebtedness that the state and local governments will experience if the
initiative is approved by voters. The fiscal impact statement must include a
detailed statement that includes the assumptions that were made to develop the
fiscal impacts. The fiscal impact statement must be written in clear and
concise language and avoid legal and technical terms when possible, and may
include easy to understand graphics. Where appropriate, the fiscal impact
statement may include both estimated dollar amounts and a description placing
the estimated dollar amounts into context.

If a fiscal impact
statement identifies a combined financial impact of at least twenty-five
million dollars on state and local governments, the office of financial
management must prepare a notice of probable impacts to be placed on the ballot
beneath the ballot title. The notice of probable impacts must be no more than
seventy-five words, must be written in clear and concise language, avoiding
legal and technical terms when possible, and may include easy to understand
graphics. Where appropriate, the notice of probable impacts may include both
estimated dollar amounts and a description placing the estimated dollar amounts
into context.

The fiscal impact
statement and the notice of probable impacts must identify which programs, if
any, will be eliminated because of a decrease in revenues or increase in costs,
expenditures, or indebtedness. If the office of financial management cannot
determine which specific government services or programs will be impacted, the
fiscal impact statement and notice of probable impacts must list five of the
largest services or programs currently funded by the impacted governments.

The office of financial
management must file the notice of probable impacts with the office of the
secretary of state no later than thirty days following certification of the
initiative pursuant to RCW 29.79.230.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
3. A new section is added
to chapter 29.79 RCW to read as follows:

Once a notice of
probable impacts is filed with the secretary of state, the secretary of state
shall immediately provide the text of the notice of probable impacts to the
person proposing the initiative and any others who have made written request
for notification of the exact language of the notice.

A person dissatisfied
with the notice of probable impacts may appeal to the superior court of
Thurston County within five days of the filing date. A copy of the petition
and a notice of the appeal must be served on the secretary of state and the
attorney general. The court shall examine the measure, the notice of probable
impacts, the fiscal impact statement, and objections, and may hear arguments.
The court shall render its decision and certify to and file with the secretary
of state a notice of probable impacts it determines will be sufficient.

The decision of the
superior court is final, and its notice of probable impacts is the established
notice of probable impacts. The appeal must be heard without costs to either
party.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
4. A new section is added
to chapter 29.79 RCW to read as follows:

The notice of probable
impacts shall appear on all ballots directly beneath the ballot title. Above
the notice must be a heading in capital letters, stating "NOTICE OF
PROBABLE IMPACTS OF INITIATIVE."

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 5. This act is necessary for
the immediate preservation of the public peace, health, or safety, or support
of the state government and its existing public institutions, and takes effect
immediately.

---
END ---