BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF
WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1. RCW 43.190.040 and 1983
c 290 s 4 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) Any long-term care
ombudsman authorized by this chapter or a local governmental authority shall
have training or experience or both in the following areas:

(a) Gerontology,
long-term care, or other related social services programs.

(b) The legal system.

(c) Dispute or problem
resolution techniques, including investigation, mediation, and negotiation.

(2) A long-term care
ombudsman shall not have been employed by or participated in the management
of any long-term care facility within the past ((three years)) year.

(3) A long-term care
ombudsman shall not have been employed in a governmental position with direct
involvement in the licensing, certification, or regulation of long-term care
facilities within the past year.

(4) No long-term
care ombudsman or any member of his or her immediate family shall have, or have
had within the past ((three years)) year, any ((pecuniary))
significant ownership or investment interest in ((the provision of
long-term health care facilities)) one or more long-term care
facilities.

(5) A
long-term care ombudsman shall not be assigned to a long-term care facility in
which a member of that ombudsman's immediate family resides.

--- END ---