BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF
WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1. RCW 27.34.330 and 1999 c
295 s 2 are each amended to read as follows:

The Washington state
historical society shall establish a competitive process to solicit proposals
for and prioritize heritage capital projects for potential funding in the state
capital budget. The society shall adopt rules governing project eligibility
and evaluation criteria. Rules governing evaluation criteria must specify
objective criteria; the method by which applications will be measured against
the criteria; and the method by which applications will be ranked against other
applications. The society must provide project applicants with an explanation
of the criteria that a successful applicant must meet. Application for
funding of specific projects may be made to the society by local governments,
public development authorities, nonprofit corporations, tribal governments, and
other entities, as determined by the society. Applications must include an
independent financial statement.

An advisory panel is
established to determine project funding guidelines and review project
applications. The advisory panel consists of at least five members appointed
by each of the following: The Washington museum association; the eastern
Washington state historical society; the office of the secretary of state; the
office of archaeology and historic preservation; and other members appointed by
the director of the Washington state historical society as necessary. Advisory
panel members must have relevant, demonstrated interest or expertise in the
heritage field, and they must reflect the state's cultural and geographic
diversity. The society, with the advice of ((leaders in the heritage
field, including but not limited to representatives from the office of the
secretary of state, the eastern Washington state historical society, and the
state office of archaeology and historic preservation)) the advisory
panel, shall establish and submit a prioritized list of heritage capital
projects to the governor and the legislature in the society's biennial capital
budget request. The list shall include a description of each project, the
amount of recommended state funding, and documentation of nonstate funds to be
used for the project. The total amount of recommended state funding for
projects on a biennial project list shall not exceed four million dollars. The
department may provide an additional alternate project list which shall not
exceed five hundred thousand dollars. The prioritized list shall be developed
through open and public meetings and the amount of state funding shall not
exceed thirty-three percent of the total cost of the project. The nonstate
portion of the total project cost may include cash, the value of real property
when acquired solely for the purpose of the project, and in-kind contributions.
The department shall not sign contracts or otherwise financially obligate funds
under this section until the legislature has approved a specific list of
projects. In contracts for grants authorized under this section, the society
shall include provisions requiring that capital improvements be held by the
grantee for a specified period of time appropriate to the amount of the grant
and that facilities be used for the express purpose of the grant. If the
grantee is found to be out of compliance with provisions of the contract, the
grantee shall repay to the state general fund the principal amount of the grant
plus interest calculated at the rate of interest on state of Washington general
obligation bonds issued most closely to the date of authorization of the grant.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 2. By December 15, 2002, the
Washington state historical society must report to the ways and means committee
of the senate and the capital budget committee of the house of representatives
on evaluation criteria and procedures for awarding heritage capital projects.

---
END ---