BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF
WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec.
1. FINDINGS. The legislature finds
that current administrative requirements placed upon providers and facilities
by health carriers and other payers, including state purchased health care
programs, are burdensome. They have the unintended consequence of increasing health
care costs and reducing time available for direct patient care. Greater
scrutiny of the value added by imposing administrative requirements, and
greater focus on consistency of requirements across carriers and payers can
help decrease health system costs and increase time available for direct
patient care.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
2. A new section is added
to chapter 48.43 RCW to read as follows:

DEFINITIONS‑-STANDARDS
COMMITTEE CREATION AND DUTIES. (1) For the purposes of this section:

(a)
"Administrative requirement" or "requirement" means a
requirement placed primarily upon a health care provider or health care
facility by a carrier and other payer, including state purchased health care
programs, as defined in RCW 41.05.011(2), for the purpose of contracting,
billing, claims processing, eligibility determination, treatment authorization,
credentialing, utilization management, data sharing, or other requirements
conditioned on payment that do not involve direct patient care.

(b)
"Committee" means the committee on health care system administrative
standards created in subsection (2) of this section.

(2)(a) The committee on
health care system administrative standards is created. No later than July 1,
2002, the commissioner shall convene the committee. The committee shall
consist of representatives of health care purchasers, carriers, health care
facilities, health care providers, and consumers. The committee also shall
include the following ex officio members: The assistant secretary for the
medical assistance administration in the department of social and health
services, the assistant administrator of the basic health plan in the health
care authority, and the assistant administrator of the public employees'
benefits board plan in the health care authority.

(b) Committee members
shall receive no compensation for their service, except that nonagency members
may have travel expenses reimbursed consistent with available funds and under
RCW 43.03.050 and 43.03.060.

(c) The commissioner
shall provide administrative support for the committee and consistent with
available funds may hire staff or contract for professional assistance.

(d) The committee shall
comply with the public disclosure requirements set forth in chapter 42.17 RCW
and the open public meetings provisions of chapter 42.30 RCW.

(e) The committee has
the following duties:

(i) Review existing
administrative requirements in a manner that groups those requirements related
to specific goals, such as provider credentialing or prior authorization for
services, and for each group of requirements, identifies:

(A) The source of the
requirements;

(B) The basis for the
requirements, such as federal statute or regulation, state statute or rule, or
contract;

(C) The original
purpose or intent of the requirements, as related to appropriateness of care,
cost containment, or other goals;

(D) The degree to which
the requirements, as currently implemented, have proven to add value in
achieving their original intent or goal;

(E) The extent to which
the requirements contribute to the efficiency and effectiveness of the health
care system;

(F) The extent to which
there is consistency of requirements within each grouping across carriers and
purchasers;

(G) Whether the group
of requirements will be standardized at all under regulations implementing the
federal health insurance portability and accountability act;

(H) The extent to which
the requirements detract from direct patient care; and

(I) Costs associated
with the requirements for governmental programs, carriers, other payers,
providers, facilities, and consumers;

(ii) Review similar
efforts in the public and private sector to improve administrative efficiency
and coordinate committee activities with related organizations, if appropriate;

(iii) Conduct necessary
analyses, and prepare a health care system administrative improvement report
that includes findings and recommendations addressing at least the following:

(A) A general
description of appropriate purposes of administrative requirements and a set of
principles to be used as guidance for requirement development, modification,
consolidation, and elimination;

(B) Requirements that
should be eliminated completely because they do not add value to the health
care delivery system, or that should be modified or consolidated to bring
greater consistency and value in administrative requirements across programs
and payers;

(C) Methods to ensure
that appropriate reductions in administrative requirements result in increased
resources for direct patient care; and

(D) Statutory or
regulatory modification necessary to implement the recommendations; and

(iv) Submit the initial
health care system administrative improvement report to the commissioner, the
governor, the house of representatives health care committee, and the senate
health and long-term care committee by July 1, 2003.

(f) The commissioner
may reconvene the committee, as necessary, and when doing so, may modify the
timelines under this section.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
3. A new section is added
to chapter 48.43 RCW to read as follows:

ADMINISTRATIVE
STANDARDS‑-RULES AND ENFORCEMENT. (1) Upon review of the health care
system administrative improvement report established under section 2 of this
act, the commissioner shall adopt necessary rules implementing the report's
recommendations to the extent permitted by law and under chapter 34.05 RCW.

(2) On a date set by
the commissioner, but in no case earlier than July 1, 2004, the following
entities must comply with the rules adopted under this section: Health
carriers in providing health benefit plans; the state health care authority in
providing public employee benefits, under chapter 41.05 RCW, and the basic
health plan, under chapter 70.47 RCW; and the department of social and health
services in providing medical assistance and other medical services programs,
under chapter 74.09 RCW.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
4. A new section is added
to chapter 41.05 RCW to read as follows:

ADMINISTRATIVE
STANDARDS‑-HEALTH CARE AUTHORITY. Beginning July 1, 2004, or a
subsequent date set by the insurance commissioner under section 2(f) of this
act, the administrator shall comply with the health care system administrative
standards adopted under sections 2 and 3 of this act.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
5. A new section is added
to chapter 70.47 RCW to read as follows:

ADMINISTRATIVE
STANDARDS‑-BASIC HEALTH PLAN. Beginning July 1, 2004, or a subsequent
date set by the insurance commissioner under section 2(f) of this act, the
administrator shall comply with the health care system administrative standards
adopted under sections 2 and 3 of this act.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
6. A new section is added
to chapter 74.09 RCW to read as follows:

ADMINISTRATIVE
STANDARDS‑-MEDICAL ASSISTANCE. Beginning January 1, 2004, or a
subsequent date set by the insurance commissioner under section 2(f) of this
act, the secretary shall comply with the health care system administrative
standards adopted under sections 2 and 3 of this act to the extent those
standards are consistent with the requirements of title XIX of the federal
social security act.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
7. CAPTIONS NOT LAW.
Captions used in this act are not any part of the law.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 8. APPROPRIATION. The sum
of one hundred thousand dollars, or as much thereof as may be necessary, is
appropriated for the biennium ending June 30, 2003, from the insurance
commissioner's regulatory account to the insurance commissioner for the
purposes set forth in sections 2 and 3 of this act.

---
END ---