BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF
WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec.
1. A new section is added
to chapter 43.31 RCW to read as follows:

The department shall
carry out a program to fund individual development accounts established for
eligible low-income wage earners.

(1) An individual
development account may be established by or on behalf of an eligible
low-income wage earner for the purpose of enabling the recipient to accumulate
funds for a qualified purpose described in subsection (2) of this section.

(2) A qualified purpose
as described in this subsection is one or more of the following, as provided by
the qualified entity providing assistance to the low-income wage earner:

(a) Postsecondary
expenses paid from an individual development account directly to an eligible
educational institution;

(b) Qualified
acquisition costs with respect to a qualified principal residence for a
qualified first-time homebuyer, if paid from an individual development account
directly to the persons to whom the amounts are due;

(c) Amounts paid from
an individual development account directly to a business capitalization account
which is established in a federally insured financial institution and is
restricted to use solely for qualified business capitalization expenses.

(3) An eligible
low-income wage earner may only contribute to an individual development account
amounts derived from earned income, as defined in section 911(d)(2) of the
internal revenue code of 1986.

(4) The department
shall establish rules to ensure funds held in an individual development account
are only withdrawn for a qualified purpose as provided in this section.

(5) An individual development
account established under this section shall be a trust created or organized in
the United States and funded through periodic contributions by the establishing
eligible working-poor individual and matched by or through a qualified entity
for a qualified purpose as provided in this section.

(6) The department
shall adopt rules authorizing the use of organizations using microcredit and
microenterprise approaches to assisting working-poor individuals to become
financially self-sufficient.

(7) The department
shall adopt rules implementing the use of individual development accounts by
eligible low-income wage earners.

(8) Nothing in this
section shall be construed to create an entitlement to matching moneys.

(9) For the purposes of
this section:

(a) "Eligible
educational institution," "postsecondary educational expenses,"
"qualified acquisition costs," "qualified business,"
"qualified business capitalization expenses," "qualified
expenditures," "qualified first‑time homebuyer,"
"date of acquisition," "qualified plan," and
"qualified principal residence" have the same meaning as provided for
them in P.L. 104‑193.

(b) "Low-income
wage earner" means a person whose adjusted income is less than eighty
percent of the median family income, adjusted for household size, for the
county or metropolitan statistical area where they reside.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 2. The sum of two hundred
fifty thousand dollars, or as much thereof as may be necessary, is appropriated
for the fiscal year ending June 30, 2003, from the general fund to the
department of community, trade, and economic development for the purposes of
this act.

---
END ---