BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF
WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec.
1. A new section is added
to chapter 46.20 RCW to read as follows:

(1)(a) Any person who
had his or her driving privileges revoked as a juvenile pursuant to RCW
46.20.265 and was not otherwise eligible to drive at the time of the initial
revocation may apply for an occupational driver's license if he or she meets
the following requirements:

(i) Has obtained a
valid driver's instruction permit under subsection (2) of this section;

(ii) Is eighteen years
of age or older;

(iii) Has completed a
traffic safety education program approved and accredited by the office of the
superintendent of public instruction or a course of instruction offered by a
licensed driver training school as defined by RCW 46.82.280(1);

(iv) Has successfully
passed a driver licensing examination that would otherwise qualify the
applicant for a driver's license had he or she not been subject to the
revocation;

(v) Pays the required
fee for the driver's license examination;

(vi) Pays the
occupational driver's license application fee pursuant to RCW 46.20.380;

(vii) Within one year
immediately preceding the date of the offense that gave rise to the present
conviction, the applicant has not committed any offense relating to motor
vehicles for which suspension or revocation of a driver's license is mandatory;

(viii) Within seven
years immediately preceding the date of the offense that gave rise to the
present conviction or incident, the applicant has not committed any of the
following offenses: (A) Driving or being in actual physical control of a motor
vehicle while under the influence of intoxicating liquor; (B) vehicular
homicide under RCW 46.61.520; or (C) vehicular assault under RCW 46.61.522;

(ix)(A) Is engaged in
an occupation, trade, apprenticeship, or on-the-job training that makes it
essential that he or she operate a motor vehicle; or (B) is enrolled at a
college, university, community college, technical college, vocational school,
trade school, or private career school for a minimum of six credit hours that
makes it essential that he or she operate a motor vehicle; and

(x) Files satisfactory
proof of financial responsibility under chapter 46.29 RCW.

(b) The department,
upon receipt of the prescribed fee and application and upon determining that
the applicant is engaged in an occupation, trade, apprenticeship, or on-the-job
training or is enrolled at a college, university, community college, technical
college, vocational school, trade school, or private career school for a
minimum of six credit hours that makes it essential that the applicant operate
a motor vehicle, may issue an occupational driver's license and may set
definite restrictions as provided in RCW 46.20.394. No person may petition
for, and the department shall not issue, an occupational driver's license that
is effective during the first thirty days of any suspension or revocation.

(c) An occupational
driver's license issued to an applicant under this section shall be valid for
the period of the suspension or revocation but not more than two years. An
applicant may apply for the renewal of an occupational driver's license.

(2)(a) Any person who
had his or her driving privileges revoked as a juvenile pursuant to RCW
46.20.265 and was not otherwise eligible to drive at the time of the initial
revocation may apply for a driver's instruction permit if the applicant has
passed all the parts of the examination other than the driving test, provided
the information required by RCW 46.20.091, paid a five-dollar fee, and meets
the following requirements:

(i) Is at least
eighteen years of age;

(ii) Has submitted a
proper application; and

(iii) Is enrolled in a
traffic safety education program approved and accredited by the office of the
superintendent of public instruction or a course of instruction offered by a
licensed driver training school as defined by RCW 46.82.280(1).

(b) A person holding a
driver's instruction permit may drive a motor vehicle, other than a motorcycle,
upon the public highway if:

(i) The person has
immediate possession of the permit; and

(ii) An approved
instructor, or licensed driver with at least five years of driving experience,
occupies a seat beside the driver.

(c) A driver's instruction
permit issued under this section is valid for one year after the date of issue.

(3) The director shall
cancel an occupational driver's license upon receipt of notice that the holder
thereof has been convicted of operating a motor vehicle in violation of its
restrictions, or of a separate offense that under this chapter would warrant
suspension or revocation of a regular driver's license. The cancellation is
effective as of the date of the conviction, and continues with the same force
and effect as any suspension or revocation under this title.

(4) For
the purposes of this section, if transportation to and from a place of
employment or postsecondary education is essential, an occupational driver's
license may be granted.

--- END ---