BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF
WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec.
1. The legislature finds
that under existing residential landlord-tenant laws a landlord does not have
means to immediately evict a tenant that is involved in criminal activity.

The legislature further
finds that with the absence of an immediate legal means to remove these
tenants, the landlord will suffer significant loss in the property. This loss
will continue to grow the longer the tenant is allowed to remain on the
property pending court action under the existing unlawful detainer law.

It is the intent of the
legislature to protect a landlord from financial loss by providing a system for
immediate eviction of tenants involved in criminal activity.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
2. A new section is added
to chapter 59.18 RCW to read as follows:

(1) A landlord, with
supporting evidence and documentation, may request a court having jurisdiction
to authorize the immediate eviction of a tenant, if the tenant has:

(a) Misbranded drugs by
misleading representation under RCW 69.04.530;

(b) Possessed drugs in
violation of the uniform controlled substances act, chapter 69.50 RCW; or

(c) Committed a
violation involving methamphetamine under RCW 69.50.401 or 69.50.440.

(2) Following a request
under subsection (1) of this section, a court will convene a hearing to
determine whether the tenant should be immediately removed. The court will
request that the landlord or the landlord's representative, the tenant or the
tenant's legal representative, the sheriff or law enforcement personnel, as
well as a representative of a local community services agency, attend the
hearing. The court may issue a writ of restitution for the immediate eviction
of the tenant.

(3)(a) Upon eviction,
the tenant as well as all persons living with the tenant must be removed from
the premises. The tenant's personal property may be retrieved within three
days if the parties are accompanied by a judicial representative.

(b) The eviction must
take place on the same day the writ of restitution is signed by the court. If
scheduling does not permit for the issuance of the writ of restitution the same
day, it must be served by noon the following day.

(c) To enforce the
court-ordered eviction, the landlord must be accompanied by the sheriff.

(4)
Nothing in this section shall be construed to reduce the requirement of the
landlord having to post a bond under RCW 59.12.090.

---
END ---