BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF
WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec.
1. Branch campuses were
first established in 1989, in response to the need to expand access to upper-division
and master's level degree programs for students living in major urban areas of
the state. Since the establishment of branch campuses no comprehensive
assessment has been made of the effectiveness of the campuses in fulfilling
their mission of instruction, scholarship, and services, in addition to meeting
enrollment and other legislatively mandated goals. A review of branch campuses
should be conducted to determine if the original intent of branch campuses is
being met. It is also necessary to determine if the original goals are
compatible with current educational needs and whether the branch campus system
has the flexibility and capacity to respond adequately to future needs in
higher education.

The Washington state
institute for public policy shall review and evaluate the following: (1) The
original mission for branch campuses; (2) the extent to which branch campuses
are meeting their original mission; (3) the original mission of branch campuses
in relation to current needs in higher education; and (4) what policy or
procedural options could be implemented to allow branch campuses to respond
more effectively to demographic changes in student populations and other
dynamic market forces in higher education statewide, and the unique educational
needs in their respective communities.

The
Washington state institute for public policy shall submit a draft report to the
appropriate legislative committees by September 1, 2002, with the final report
to be submitted by December 12, 2002.

---
END ---