BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF
WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1. RCW 35.67.370 and 1998 c
61 s 1 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) Cities,
towns, or counties may not require existing mobile home parks to replace
existing, functional septic systems with a sewer system within the community
unless the local board of health determines that the septic system is failing.

(2)
Cities, towns, counties, local improvement districts, utility local improvement
districts, municipal corporations, political subdivisions, or any other
persons, firms, or corporations are prohibited from requiring existing mobile
home parks to pay a utility assessment, connection charge, or any other charge
associated with a utility until the mobile home park connects to that utility
or no longer operates as a mobile home park under chapter 59.20 RCW. This act
is remedial in nature and applies retroactively to June 11, 1998.

--- END ---