BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF
WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1. RCW 18.79.110 and 1994
sp.s. c 9 s 411 are each amended to read as follows:

The commission shall
keep a record of all of its proceedings and make such reports to the governor
as may be required. The commission shall define by rules what constitutes
specialized and advanced levels of nursing practice as recognized by the
medical and nursing profession. The commission may adopt rules or issue
advisory opinions in response to questions put to it by professional health
associations, nursing practitioners, and consumers in this state concerning the
authority of various categories of nursing practitioners to perform particular
acts. The commission shall have oversight over health care services
delivered in public schools, in consultation with the office of the
superintendent of public instruction.

The commission shall
approve curricula and shall establish criteria for minimum standards for
schools preparing persons for licensing as registered nurses, advanced
registered nurse practitioners, and licensed practical nurses under this
chapter. The commission shall approve such schools of nursing as meet the
requirements of this chapter and the commission, and the commission shall
approve establishment of basic nursing education programs and shall establish
criteria as to the need for and the size of a program and the type of program
and the geographical location. The commission shall establish criteria for
proof of reasonable currency of knowledge and skill as a basis for safe
practice after three years' inactive or lapsed status. The commission shall
establish criteria for licensing by endorsement. The commission shall
determine examination requirements for applicants for licensing as registered
nurses, advanced registered nurse practitioners, and licensed practical nurses
under this chapter, and shall certify to the secretary for licensing duly
qualified applicants.

The commission shall
adopt such rules under chapter 34.05 RCW as are necessary to fulfill the
purposes of this chapter.

The commission is the
successor in interest of the board of nursing and the board of practical
nursing. All contracts, undertakings, agreements, rules, regulations,
decisions, orders, and policies of the former board of nursing or the board of
practical nursing continue in full force and effect under the commission until
the commission amends or rescinds those rules, regulations, decisions, orders,
or policies.

The members of the commission
are immune from suit in an action, civil or criminal, based on its disciplinary
proceedings or other official acts performed in good faith as members of the
commission.

Whenever
the workload of the commission requires, the commission may request that the
secretary appoint pro tempore members of the commission. When serving, pro
tempore members of the commission have all of the powers, duties, and
immunities, and are entitled to all of the emoluments, including travel
expenses, of regularly appointed members of the commission.

--- END ---