BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF
WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec.
1. A new section is added
to chapter 46.16 RCW to read as follows:

(1) The department
shall work in cooperation with the Lewis and Clark bicentennial advisory
committee and the Washington state historical society to create and design a
special Lewis and Clark bicentennial license plate. The department shall issue
this special plate by no later than January 1, 2004. The department need not
replace these special plates if they are lost, stolen, damaged, defaced, or
destroyed. The Lewis and Clark bicentennial license plates are exempt from RCW
46.16.233.

(2) The special Lewis
and Clark bicentennial license plate may be used in lieu of regular or
personalized license plates for motor vehicles required to display two motor
vehicle license plates, excluding vehicles registered under chapter 46.87 RCW,
upon terms and conditions established by the department.

Sec. 2. RCW 46.16.313 and 1997 c
291 s 8 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) The department may
establish a fee of no more than forty dollars for each type of special
license plates issued under RCW 46.16.301(1) (a), (b), or (c), as existing
before amendment by section 5, chapter 291, Laws of 1997, ((in an amount
calculated)) to offset the cost of production of the special license plates
and the administration of this program. ((Until December 31, 1997, the fee
shall not exceed thirty-five dollars, but effective with vehicle registrations
due or to become due on January 1, 1998, the department may adjust the fee to
no more than forty dollars.)) This fee is in addition to all other fees
required to register and license the vehicle for which the plates have been
requested. All such additional special license plate fees collected by the
department shall be deposited in the state treasury and credited to the motor
vehicle fund.

(2) ((Until December
31, 1997, in addition to all fees and taxes required to be paid upon
application, registration, and renewal registration of a motor vehicle, the
holder of a collegiate license plate shall pay a fee of thirty dollars. The
department shall deduct an amount not to exceed two dollars of each fee
collected under this subsection for administration and collection expenses
incurred by it. The remaining proceeds, minus the cost of plate production,
shall be remitted to the custody of the state treasurer with a proper
identifying detailed report. The state treasurer shall credit the funds to the
appropriate collegiate license plate fund as provided in RCW 28B.10.890.

(3) Effective with
vehicle registrations due or to become due on January 1, 1998,)) In addition to all fees and taxes
required to be paid upon application and registration of a motor vehicle, the
holder of a collegiate license plate shall pay an initial fee of forty
dollars. The department shall deduct an amount not to exceed twelve dollars of
each fee collected under this subsection for administration and collection
expenses incurred by it. The remaining proceeds shall be remitted to the
custody of the state treasurer with a proper identifying detailed report. The
state treasurer shall credit the funds to the appropriate collegiate license
plate fund as provided in RCW 28B.10.890.

(((4) Effective with
annual renewals due or to become due on January 1, 1999,)) (3) In
addition to all fees and taxes required to be paid upon renewal of a motor
vehicle registration, the holder of a collegiate license plate shall pay a fee
of thirty dollars. The department shall deduct an amount not to exceed two
dollars of each fee collected under this subsection for administration and
collection expenses incurred by it. The remaining proceeds shall be remitted
to the custody of the state treasurer with a proper identifying detailed
report. The state treasurer shall credit the funds to the appropriate
collegiate license plate fund as provided in RCW 28B.10.890.

(((5))) (4)
In addition to all fees and taxes required to be paid upon application and
registration of a motor vehicle, the holder of a special baseball stadium
license plate shall pay an initial fee of forty dollars. The department shall
deduct an amount not to exceed twelve dollars of each fee collected under this
subsection for administration and collection expenses incurred by it. The
remaining proceeds, minus the cost of plate production, shall be distributed to
a county for the purpose of paying the principal and interest payments on bonds
issued by the county to construct a baseball stadium, as defined in RCW 82.14.0485,
including reasonably necessary preconstruction costs, while the taxes are being
collected under RCW 82.14.360. After this date, the state treasurer shall
credit the funds to the state general fund.

(((6) Effective with
annual renewals due or to become due on January 1, 1999,)) (5) In
addition to all fees and taxes required to be paid upon renewal of a motor
vehicle registration, the holder of a special baseball stadium license plate
shall pay a fee of thirty dollars. The department shall deduct an amount not
to exceed two dollars of each fee collected under this subsection for
administration and collection expenses incurred by it. The remaining proceeds
shall be distributed to a county for the purpose of paying the principal and
interest payments on bonds issued by the county to construct a baseball
stadium, as defined in RCW 82.14.0485, including reasonably necessary
preconstruction costs, while the taxes are being collected under RCW
82.14.360. After this date, the state treasurer shall credit the funds to the
state general fund.

(6) Effective with
vehicle registrations due or to become due on January 1, 2004, through December
31, 2006, in addition to all fees and taxes required to be paid upon application
and registration of a motor vehicle, the holder of a special Lewis and Clark
bicentennial license plate shall pay an initial fee of forty dollars. The
department shall deduct an amount not to exceed twelve dollars of each fee
collected under this subsection for administration and collection of expenses
incurred by it. The remaining proceeds will be deposited in the state treasury
and credited to the Lewis and Clark bicentennial license plate account.

(7) Effective with
annual renewals due or to become due on January 1, 2005, and thereafter, in
addition to all fees and taxes required to be paid upon renewal of a motor
vehicle registration, the holder of a special Lewis and Clark bicentennial
license plate shall pay a fee of thirty dollars. The department shall deduct
an amount not to exceed two dollars of each fee collected under this subsection
for administration and collection expenses incurred by it. The remaining
proceeds will be deposited in the state treasury and credited to the Lewis and Clark
bicentennial license plate account.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
3. A new section is added
to chapter 27.34 RCW to read as follows:

The Lewis
and Clark bicentennial license plate account is created in the state treasury.
Expenditures from the account may be expended only for Lewis and Clark facility
preservation and construction activities, as determined by the Lewis and Clark
bicentennial advisory committee. Upon the expiration of the Lewis and Clark
bicentennial advisory committee on June 30, 2007, the director of the
Washington state historical society, or the director's designee, shall
authorize all expenditures for the purposes provided for in this section.
Moneys in the account may only be spent after appropriation and are subject to
allotment procedures under chapter 43.88 RCW.

---
END ---