BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF
WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec.
1. A new section is added
to chapter 28A.210 RCW to read as follows:

Each
school district board of directors shall adopt and implement a policy that (1)
prohibits any school personnel from recommending the use of psychotropic drugs
for any child and (2) requires school personnel to send a letter to a parent or
legal guardian recommending that an appropriate medical or behavioral health
evaluation be conducted by a licensed physician if school personnel perceive
that a child may have a behavioral or psychological problem.

--- END ---