BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF
WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec.
1. A new section is added
to chapter 36.102 RCW to read as follows:

(1)(a) Any professional
football team performing in a stadium constructed or operated under this
chapter, and any league, association, or conference affiliated with the team,
shall not deny local broadcast rights for a live broadcast of any event held in
the stadium to an area within seventy-five miles of the stadium based on attendance.

(b) The prohibition in
this section does not apply if, seventy-two hours before the event, the
percentage of seats not sold for the event is greater than the percentage of
the total cost of the construction of the stadium paid with public funds.

(2) This section is not
intended to impair existing contract rights, but shall be applied to any
extension or renegotiation of an existing contract and to any new contract
between a professional football team performing in a stadium constructed or
operated under this chapter, and any league, association, or conference or any
local, regional, or national television broadcaster, cable network, or
satellite carrier.

(3) The
legislature finds that the practices covered by this section are matters
vitally affecting the public interest for the purpose of applying the consumer
protection act, chapter 19.86 RCW. A violation of this section is not
reasonable in relation to the development and preservation of business and is
an unfair or deceptive act in trade or commerce and an unfair method of
competition for the purpose of applying the consumer protection act, chapter
19.86 RCW.

--- END ---