BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF
WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1. RCW 35.21.779 and 1995 c
399 s 39 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) In cities or towns
where a state hospital designated in RCW 72.23.020 is located or where
the estimated value of state-owned facilities constitutes ten percent or more
of the total assessed valuation, the state agency or institution owning the
facilities or hospital shall contract with the city or town to pay an
equitable share for fire and police protection services. The contract
shall be negotiated as provided in subsections (2) through (6) of this section
and shall provide for payment by the agency or institution to the city or town.

(2) A city or town
seeking to enter into fire or police protection contract negotiations
shall provide written notification to the department of community, trade, and
economic development and the state agencies or institutions that own property
within the jurisdiction, of its intent to contract for fire or police
protection services. Where there are multiple state agencies located within a
single jurisdiction, a city may choose to notify only the department of
community, trade, and economic development, which in turn shall notify the
agencies or institution that own property within the jurisdiction of the city's
intent to contract for fire or police protection services. Any such
notification shall be based on the valuation procedures, if applicable,
based on commonly accepted standards, adopted by the department of community,
trade, and economic development in consultation with the department of general
administration and the association of Washington cities.

(3) The department of
community, trade, and economic development shall review any such notification
to ensure that the valuation procedures and results, if applicable, are
accurate. The department will notify each affected city or town and state
agency or institution of the results of their review within thirty days of
receipt of notification.

(4) The parties
negotiating fire or police protection contracts under this section shall
conduct those negotiations in good faith. Whenever there are multiple state
agencies located within a single jurisdiction, every effort shall be made by
the state to consolidate negotiations on behalf of all affected agencies.

(5) In the event of
notification by one of the parties that an agreement cannot be reached on the
terms and conditions of a fire or police protection contract, the
director of the department of community, trade, and economic development shall
mediate a resolution of the disagreement. In the event of a continued impasse,
the director of the department of community, trade, and economic development
shall recommend a resolution.

(6) If the parties
reject the recommendation of the director and an impasse continues, the
director shall direct the parties to arbitration. The parties shall agree on a
neutral arbitrator, and the fees and expenses of the arbitrator shall be shared
equally between the parties. The arbitration shall be a final offer, total
arbitration, with the arbitrator empowered only to pick the final offer of one
of the parties or the recommended resolution by the director of the department
of community, trade, and economic development. The decision of the arbitrator
shall be final, binding, and nonappealable on the parties.

(7) The provisions of
this section shall not apply if a city or town and a state agency or
institution have contracted pursuant to RCW 35.21.775.

(8) The
provisions of this section do not apply to cities and towns not meeting the
conditions in subsection (1) of this section. Cities and towns not meeting the
conditions of subsection (1) of this section may enter into contracts pursuant
to RCW 35.21.775.

--- END ---