BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF
WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1. RCW 28B.80.390 and 1985
c 370 s 10 are each amended to read as follows:

The board shall consist
of ((nine)) ten members, one of whom shall be a student,
who are representative of the public, including women and the racial minority
community. All members shall be appointed at large by the governor and
approved by the senate. The governor shall appoint the chair, who shall serve
at the governor's pleasure.

Sec. 2. RCW 28B.80.400 and 1985
c 370 s 11 are each amended to read as follows:

The
members of the board, except the chair and the student member, shall
serve for terms of four years, the terms expiring on June 30th of the fourth
year of the term except that in the case of initial members, two shall be
appointed to two-year terms, three shall be appointed to three-year terms, and
three shall be appointed to four-year terms. The student member shall hold
his or her office for a term of one year from the first day of July until his
or her successor is appointed.

---
END ---