BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF
WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec.
1. The legislature
recognizes that on February 19, 1942, the President of the United States issued
Executive Order 9066 which authorized military rule over civilian law and
lives; that Executive Order 9066 led to the World War II evacuation and
internment of more than 120,000 Japanese Americans, most of whom were United
States citizens by birth; that Japanese Americans lost their homes and livelihoods
and suffered physical and psychological damage; that, despite widespread
hostility and discrimination, Japanese Americans served with distinction in the
United States military effort as members of the Military Intelligence Service
and in the segregated 100th Infantry Battalion and the 442nd Regimental Combat
Team. The legislature further recognizes that, in the name of "military
necessity," Japanese Americans were deprived of their fundamental
constitutional rights and civil liberties; and that the Japanese American
experience during World War II tragically illuminates the fragile nature of our
most cherished national beliefs and values.

The legislature
declares that an annual day of recognition be observed in remembrance of
Japanese Americans interned during World War II as a reminder that, regardless
of the provocation, individual rights and freedoms must never be denied.

Sec. 2. RCW 1.16.050 and 2000 c
60 s 1 are each amended to read as follows:

The following are legal
holidays: Sunday; the first day of January, commonly called New Year's Day;
the third Monday of January, being celebrated as the anniversary of the birth
of Martin Luther King, Jr.; the third Monday of February to be known as
Presidents' Day and to be celebrated as the anniversary of the births of
Abraham Lincoln and George Washington; the last Monday of May, commonly known
as Memorial Day; the fourth day of July, being the anniversary of the
Declaration of Independence; the first Monday in September, to be known as
Labor Day; the eleventh day of November, to be known as Veterans' Day; the
fourth Thursday in November, to be known as Thanksgiving Day; the day
immediately following Thanksgiving Day; and the twenty-fifth day of December,
commonly called Christmas Day.

Employees of the state
and its political subdivisions, except employees of school districts and except
those nonclassified employees of institutions of higher education who hold
appointments or are employed under contracts to perform services for periods of
less than twelve consecutive months, shall be entitled to one paid holiday per
calendar year in addition to those specified in this section. Each employee of
the state or its political subdivisions may select the day on which the
employee desires to take the additional holiday provided for herein after
consultation with the employer pursuant to guidelines to be promulgated by rule
of the appropriate personnel authority, or in the case of local government by
ordinance or resolution of the legislative authority.

If any of the above
specified state legal holidays are also federal legal holidays but observed on
different dates, only the state legal holidays shall be recognized as a paid
legal holiday for employees of the state and its political subdivisions except
that for port districts and the law enforcement and public transit employees of
municipal corporations, either the federal or the state legal holiday, but in
no case both, may be recognized as a paid legal holiday for employees.

Whenever any legal
holiday, other than Sunday, falls upon a Sunday, the following Monday shall be
the legal holiday.

Whenever any legal
holiday falls upon a Saturday, the preceding Friday shall be the legal holiday.

Nothing in this section
shall be construed to have the effect of adding or deleting the number of paid
holidays provided for in an agreement between employees and employers of
political subdivisions of the state or as established by ordinance or
resolution of the local government legislative authority.

The legislature
declares that the twelfth day of October shall be recognized as Columbus Day
but shall not be considered a legal holiday for any purposes.

The legislature
declares that the ninth day of April shall be recognized as former prisoner of
war recognition day but shall not be considered a legal holiday for any
purposes.

The legislature
declares that the twenty-sixth day of January shall be recognized as Washington
army and air national guard day but shall not be considered a legal holiday for
any purposes.

The legislature
declares that the seventh day of August shall be recognized as purple heart
recipient recognition day but shall not be considered a legal holiday for any
purposes.

The legislature
declares that the second Sunday in October be recognized as Washington state
children's day but shall not be considered a legal holiday for any purposes.

The legislature
declares that the sixteenth day of April shall be recognized as Mother Joseph
day and the fourth day of September as Marcus Whitman day, but neither shall be
considered legal holidays for any purpose.

The legislature
declares that the seventh day of December be recognized as Pearl Harbor
remembrance day but shall not be considered a legal holiday for any purpose.

The
legislature declares that the nineteenth day of February be recognized as civil
liberties day of remembrance but shall not be considered a legal holiday for
any purpose.

---
END ---