BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF
WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec.
1. (1) The legislature finds
that:

(a) In order to assist
the already ailing revenue of schools in Washington, schools should be able to
earn money in whatever means possible within reason;

(b) A government should
not deny schools the right to earn revenue as long as the means of earning the
revenue are within reason;

(c) Schools should have
the right to either sell unused, usable books, or give them away in a
charitable fashion as opposed to being forced to let them sit unproductively
for an indefinite amount of time;

(d) Some schools
obviously are much more unfortunate than others, therefor if schools obtain
unneeded, older books they should reserve the right to give them to those
schools or libraries less fortunate, whether in the United States of America,
or a less fortunate country;

(e) Some schools carry
outdated books, and encyclopedias, and other libraries receive new books but
are not allowed to donate them; and

(f) If libraries could
donate books to places such as schools, this would decrease the amount of money
spent each year on text material.

(2) The purposes of
this act are to:

(a) Reserve the right
for schools throughout Washington to either sell unused, usable books or to
give them away in a charitable fashion;

(b) Aid schools
throughout Washington with their plundering revenue;

(c) Free up more space
in already crowded schools;

(d) Assist those
schools less fortunate; and

(e) Allow libraries to
donate books to places such as schools.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
2. The definitions in this
section apply throughout this chapter unless the context clearly requires
otherwise.

(1) "Aid"
means the act of assisting others, or helping them help themselves.

(2)
"Charitable" means the act of giving by means and intentions of
assisting others.

(3) "Donate"
means the act of giving without expecting consideration in return.

(4) "Give them
away" means the act of giving something to a person and not expecting any
consideration in return.

(5)
"Government" means the political direction and control exercised over
the actions of the members, citizens, or inhabitants of communities, societies,
and states.

(6) "Information
has been replaced" means literature that contains material that is so
outdated, it cannot be used such as medical books and science books.

(7) "Less
fortunate" means those who have less than others in their same category.

(8)
"Libraries" means a public facility designed to give people the
opportunity to read literature of all types.

(9) "Not
used" means items that have been used previously, but now are not.

(10) "School"
means a public facility designed to give people of all ages the opportunity to
learn.

(11)
"Unusable" means items that are beyond the point of use.

(12) "Worthless"
means items that are beyond the point of use.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
3. Except as otherwise
provided in this section, government shall not deny schools the right to sell
books that are not used and are in usable condition, or to give them away to
charitable organizations, and shall not deny libraries the right to donate
books. However, if books are unusable, and are worthless, schools may not sell
them and if books contain information that has been replaced, schools may not
sell or donate them, and libraries may not donate them.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
4. This chapter may be known
and cited as the used book surplus act.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
5. Sections 1 through 4 of
this act constitute a new chapter in Title 28A RCW.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 6. This act takes effect
August 1, 2002.

---
END ---