BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF
WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec.
1. (1) It is the intent of
the legislature to encourage congruency among energy policy, technology policy,
and economic development policy in order to better serve the citizens of
Washington and to improve the economic climate and opportunities throughout the
state. This includes policies that support the deployment of current and
emerging technologies.

(2) It is further the
intent of the legislature that energy and telecommunications regulation reflect
a less costly regulatory process that can ultimately benefit the consumer,
eliminate duplication of functions, and improve government efficiency.

(3) It is further the
intent of the legislature that the state continue to support policies that
produce affordable energy.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
2. (1) The joint legislative
audit and review committee will conduct a performance audit of the utilities
and transportation commission focused on its responsibilities regarding
telecommunications, energy, and natural gas. The performance audit will
include, but not be limited to:

(a) An analysis of the
roles and responsibilities of the commission as outlined and prescribed in
statute, regulations, and commission rules and procedures. The joint committee
may recommend changes that should be made in the roles and responsibilities of
the commission;

(b) An evaluation of
the commission's activities and programs in relationship to its strategic plan,
performance goals, and program outcomes;

(c) An analysis of the
commission's organizational structure and functions and the effect of that
organizational structure on the ability of the commission to perform its duties
and responsibilities. The analysis may include a comparison of other state
commissions' organizations, structures, and operating principles;

(d) Recommendations for
improving the accountability and performance of the utilities and
transportation commission within the framework of its current legislatively
determined roles and responsibilities.

(2) The joint committee
may contract for consulting services in conducting this performance audit.

(3) The joint committee
may appoint temporary advisory committees, as necessary, to assist the joint
committee.

(4) The joint
legislative audit and review committee shall modify the scope of the audit in
this section, to the extent necessary, to limit the costs of the audit to
conform to the level of funding provided in section 3 of this act.

(5) In conducting the
performance audit, the joint committee may consult with representatives of
regulated entities, with customers of those regulated entities, and with other
interested parties.

(6) A preliminary
report of the performance audit must be submitted to the appropriate
legislative policy and fiscal committees by December 31, 2002, and must include
the analysis of the commission's structure and functions and a work plan for
the remaining activities of the performance audit. A final report must be
submitted to the appropriate legislative policy and fiscal committees by
December 1, 2003. The joint legislative audit and review committee may extend
the report deadlines up to one year subject to the committee's biennial work
plan.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 3. Beginning July 1, 2002,
through December 31, 2003, every electrical, gas, and telecommunications
company subject to a fee under RCW 80.24.010 will pay to the commission a
surcharge for the purpose of conducting a performance audit of the utilities
and transportation commission by the joint legislative audit and review
committee under section 2 of this act and calculated as a percentage of the fee
paid by each company under RCW 80.24.010. The surcharge percentage will be the
same for all companies. The amount recovered by the surcharge imposed under
this section will be sufficient to cover the cost of the performance audit
conducted under section 2 of this act but the total amount that may be
recovered by the surcharge must not exceed four hundred thousand dollars.

---
END ---