BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF
WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec.
1. (1) The legislature finds
that preserving water quality and avoiding further degradation of already
degraded waters are clear priorities for Washington state. Storm water
management, particularly in urban areas and growing communities, presents a
tremendous challenge for maintaining and improving water quality. The
legislature finds that consistent and predictable standards for storm water management
across multiple state, federal, and local jurisdictions is imperative for the
state to achieve environmental protection in a cost-effective manner.

(2) The legislature
also finds that storm water management must satisfy state and federal water
quality requirements while also providing state and local agencies, development
interests, and others with a flexible set of tools and alternatives that can
help ensure cost-effective storm water management. The legislature recognizes
that, in attempting to address these needs, the department of ecology, working
with other agencies and stakeholders, has developed a storm water manual for
western Washington, and is in the process of developing a storm water manual
for eastern Washington. The legislature also recognizes that manuals are
designed to be used as guidelines for addressing storm water impacts resulting
from development, road construction projects, wastewater discharge, and other
actions that affect streams, waterways, and hydrological conditions. Although
the department of ecology has made a good faith effort to develop the storm
water manual in a manner that has utilized scientifically based information and
involved input from various affected parties, the legislature finds that there
has been no explicit statutory direction or guidance provided to the department
of ecology and other resource agencies in addressing storm water management.
The legislature therefore believes that the legislature should be involved in
the state's development of a storm water management process that protects
natural resources, and compliance with federal and state water quality
requirements, while providing implementation flexibility.

(3) The legislature
further finds that the state has made considerable investments in supporting
watershed management, including creation of data bases, organizational capacity
building for watershed councils, and watershed planning efforts for salmon
recovery, ground water protection, water supply, and flood management. The
legislature believes there may be significant efficiencies to be gained by
integrating storm water into a multijurisdictional watershed approach in
addition to the current focus on managing storm water on a project-by-project
basis. The legislature also believes a watershed approach may allow state and
local government to prioritize infrastructure investment and develop effective
storm water management strategies. While a significant measure of on-site
storm water management, retention, and detention should be an element of any
given project, the legislature believes that, in some circumstances, on-site
management could be combined with flexible, watershed-based mitigation tools
such as off-site mitigation, mitigation sequencing, and the acquisition or
restoration of habitat. Therefore, the legislature finds that, where
appropriate, on-site practicability analysis, innovations, and incentives for
alternative storm water management strategies, and retrofit strategies for
existing impervious surfaces within project boundaries should be evaluated.

(4) In addition, the
legislature finds that significant fragmentation in authority exists among
local, state, and federal agencies in managing storm water and that these
agencies can better coordinate standards, practices, and approaches for
managing storm water. The legislature believes state agencies and local
governments and, where appropriate, federal and tribal governments should
identify streamlining opportunities to address and improve coordination of
storm water management authority exercised by local, state, and federal
jurisdictions.

(5) Finally, the
legislature acknowledges and encourages the appropriate use of flexibility in
storm water management. To assist the legislature in reviewing the progress of
storm water management, the legislature finds that scientific reviews and
cost-benefit analysis of the storm water manual must be undertaken. In
addition, the legislature finds that a storm water advisory group should
analyze and make recommendations for flexible implementation of storm water
management programs.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
2. A new section is added
to chapter 77.85 RCW to read as follows:

(1) The independent
science panel created in RCW 77.85.040 must review the department of ecology's
storm water manual for western Washington, dated August 31, 2001. The panel
must:

(a) Determine what
scientific information was used to develop the manual, with particular
attention to the development of management practices and thresholds. The department
of ecology must make all information utilized in the development of the manual
available to the panel;

(b) Determine whether
the recommendations in the manual are supportable by the cited science. If the
manual's recommendations are based on inadequate scientific support, the panel
must identify what specific scientific studies are needed to address any
identified limitations.

(2) The panel must
determine whether the recommendations for alternative watershed-based storm
water practices for flow control and water quality treatment developed by the
storm water advisory committee established under section 3 of this act are
supportable by the cited science. If the recommendations are based on
inadequate scientific support, the panel must identify what specific scientific
studies are needed to address any identified limitations.

(3) In accordance with
the provisions of RCW 77.85.040, the panel may contract with, or otherwise
identify and consult with, other recognized experts in hydrology, stream geomorphology,
water quality, and storm water management in fulfilling the duties specified in
this section.

(4) The panel must
report its results for the storm water manual for western Washington by
December 31, 2002.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
3. A new section is added
to chapter 90.48 RCW to read as follows:

(1) The department
shall convene a storm water advisory committee to coordinate and assist with
implementation of storm water management in Washington. The storm water
advisory committee shall be representative of storm water interests from both
eastern and western Washington and shall include representatives from urban and
rural areas and arid and wet climates. The storm water advisory committee
shall consist of no more than eighteen members. The storm water advisory
committee shall include at least one representative of the department, the
department of natural resources, the department of fish and wildlife, and the
department of transportation. The storm water advisory committee also shall
include at least one representative of each of the following interests,
selected by the associations representing those interests: Counties, cities,
port districts, environmental organizations, general contractors, commercial
and industrial developers, agricultural organizations, and businesses.

(2) The department
shall invite and encourage representatives from federal agencies and tribes to
participate in the storm water advisory committee.

(3) The storm water
advisory committee shall work with the department and with the department's
eastern Washington storm water steering committee to:

(a) Improve
coordination between state and local government agencies on storm water
management, including the appropriate use of the new storm water manuals and a
streamlined permit process with consistent outcomes and goals;

(b) Develop
recommendations for alternative watershed-based practices for flow control and
water quality treatment utilizing watershed planning to assess the use of
regional storm water facilities to augment or as an alternative to site-by-site
storm water controls;

(c) Study, evaluate,
and make recommendations on the feasibility of alternative storm water
management approaches in highly urbanized areas and how best to address severely
impaired water bodies in highly urbanized areas;

(d) Study the
appropriate use of off-site watershed-based mitigation for storm water flow and
water quality impacts. The study shall address issues related to stream flow
and water quality impacts on fish species and other aquatic uses;

(e) Study, evaluate,
and make recommendations on the funding needs for local governments to meet the
new federal storm water regulations;

(f) Assist in
developing the cost-benefit analysis required in section 4 of this act;

(g) To the maximum
extent possible, coordinate efforts with the transportation permit efficiency
and accountability committee established by RCW 47.06C.030. The storm water
advisory committee must also build upon the 2000 storm water advisory committee
report to the legislature, the independent science panel's review of the manual
in section 2 of this act, and the cost-benefit analysis required in section 4
of this act; and

(h) Begin its work no
later than July 1, 2002, and complete its work by December 31, 2003.

(4) The department
shall provide a progress report to the legislature on storm water management
issues and the approach to these issues taken by the storm water advisory committee
no later than December 31, 2002.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
4. A new section is added
to chapter 90.48 RCW to read as follows:

(1) The department
shall evaluate the costs and benefits of using the storm water management manual
for western Washington. Recognizing that the manual must be consistent with
state and federal water quality requirements, the analysis must evaluate
whether the probable benefits of the best management practices in the storm
water manual exceed the probable costs of the best management practices in the
storm water manual. This analysis shall take into account both the qualitative
and quantitative benefits and costs of the best management practices.

(2) The department
shall report its results for the storm water manual for western Washington to
the appropriate committees of the legislature by December 31, 2002.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
5. While an integrated storm
water management process is being developed, the department of ecology is
strongly encouraged to use flexibility in conditioning permits dealing with
storm water management.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
6. This act is necessary for
the immediate preservation of the public peace, health, or safety, or support
of the state government and its existing public institutions, and takes effect
immediately.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 7. This act expires June 30,
2004.

---
END ---