BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF
WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1. RCW 82.14.390 and 1999 c
165 s 13 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) Except as provided
in subsection (6) of this section, the governing body of a public facilities
district created under chapter 35.57 or 36.100 RCW that either: (a) Commences
construction of a new regional center, or improvement or rehabilitation of an
existing new regional center, before January 1, 2003; or (b) creates a
public facilities district under chapter 35.57 or 36.100 RCW before January 1,
2003, and commences construction of a new regional center, or improvement or
rehabilitation of an existing regional center before January 1, 2004, may
impose a sales and use tax in accordance with the terms of this chapter. The
tax is in addition to other taxes authorized by law and shall be collected from
those persons who are taxable by the state under chapters 82.08 and 82.12 RCW
upon the occurrence of any taxable event within the public facilities
district. The rate of tax shall not exceed 0.033 percent of the selling price
in the case of a sales tax or value of the article used in the case of a use
tax.

(2) The tax imposed
under subsection (1) of this section shall be deducted from the amount of tax
otherwise required to be collected or paid over to the department of revenue
under chapter 82.08 or 82.12 RCW. The department of revenue shall perform the
collection of such taxes on behalf of the county at no cost to the public
facilities district.

(3) No tax may be
collected under this section before August 1, 2000. The tax imposed in this section
shall expire when the bonds issued for the construction of the regional center
and related parking facilities are retired, but not more than twenty-five years
after the tax is first collected.

(4) Moneys collected
under this section shall only be used for the purposes set forth in RCW
35.57.020 and must be matched with an amount from other public or private
sources equal to thirty-three percent of the amount collected under this
section, provided that amounts generated from nonvoter approved taxes
authorized under chapter 35.57 RCW or nonvoter approved taxes authorized under
chapter 36.100 RCW shall not constitute a public or private source. For the
purpose of this section, public or private sources includes, but is not limited
to cash or in-kind contributions used in all phases of the development or
improvement of the regional center, land that is donated and used for the
siting of the regional center, cash or in-kind contributions from public or
private foundations, or amounts attributed to private sector partners as part
of a public and private partnership agreement negotiated by the public
facilities district.

(5) The combined total
tax levied under this section shall not be greater than 0.033 percent. If both
a public facilities district created under chapter 35.57 RCW and a public
facilities district created under chapter 36.100 RCW impose a tax under this
section, the tax imposed by a public facilities district created under chapter
35.57 RCW shall be credited against the tax imposed by a public facilities
district created under chapter 36.100 RCW.

(6) A
public facilities district created under chapter 36.100 RCW is not eligible to
impose the tax under this section if the legislative authority of the county
where the public facilities district is located has imposed a sales and use tax
under RCW 82.14.0485 or 82.14.0494.

--- END ---