BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF
WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec.
1. The definitions in this
section apply throughout this chapter unless the context clearly requires
otherwise.

(1)
"Authority" means a city transportation authority created pursuant to
this act.

(2) "Authority
area" means the territory within a city or cities, and contiguous
unincorporated territory, or such portions thereof, as designated in the
ordinance creating the authority.

(3) "Bonds"
means bonds, notes, or other evidences of indebtedness.

(4) "Public
transportation function" means the transportation of passengers and their
incidental baggage, as authorized in this act, together with the necessary
passenger stations, terminals, parking facilities, related facilities or other
properties, and facilities necessary and appropriate for passenger and
vehicular access to and from people-moving systems.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
2. (1) Every city with a
population greater than three hundred thousand may create a city transportation
authority to perform a public transportation function. The authority shall
embrace all the territory in the authority area. A city transportation
authority shall be a municipal corporation, an independent taxing
"authority" within the meaning of Article 7, section 1 of the state
Constitution, and a "taxing district" within the meaning of Article
7, section 2 of the state Constitution.

(2) Any city
transportation authority established pursuant to this chapter shall be approved
by a majority vote of the electors residing within the proposed authority area
voting at a regular or special election. Additional territory may be added to
an authority area with the approval of the legislative authority of each city,
or county in the case of unincorporated area, within which the territory
exists, and with the approval of the electors within the area proposed to be
added to the authority area.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
3. (1) A city that
undertakes to create an authority shall propose the authority by ordinance of
the city legislative body. The ordinance shall:

(a) Propose the
authority area and the size and method of selection of the governing body of
the authority, which governing body may be appointed or elected, provided that
officers or employees of any single city may not compose a majority of the
members of the authority's governing body;

(b) Propose whether all
or a specified portion of the public transportation function will be exercised
by the authority;

(c) Propose an initial
array of taxes to be voted upon by the electors within the proposed authority
area; and

(d) Provide for an
interim governing body of the authority which shall govern the authority upon
voter approval of formation of the authority, until a permanent governing body
is selected, but in no event longer than fourteen months.

(2) An authority may
also be proposed to be created by a petition setting forth the matters
described in subsection (1) of this section, and signed by one percent of the
qualified electors of the proposed authority area.

(3) If an authority is
proposed to be created with an authority area that includes more than one city,
or the unincorporated area of a county, an ordinance shall be passed by the
legislative authority of all cities and counties within the proposed authority
area, or in the alternative, a petition shall be signed by one percent of the
qualified electors of the proposed authority area within each city or
unincorporated area of a county.

(4) Upon approval of
its formation by the qualified electors, the governing body of an authority, or
interim governing body, as applicable, shall adopt bylaws determining, among
other things, the authority's officers and the method of their selection, and
other matters the governing body deems appropriate.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
4. Every authority has the
following powers:

(1) To acquire by
purchase, condemnation, gift, or grant and to lease, construct, add to,
improve, replace, repair, maintain, operate, and regulate the use of certain
public transportation facilities, including monorails, trams and trolleys, and
including passenger terminal and parking facilities and properties, and other
facilities and properties as may be necessary for passenger and vehicular access
to and from public transportation facilities, together with all lands, rights
of way, and property within or outside the authority area, and together with
equipment and accessories necessary or appropriate for these facilities;

(2) To fix rates,
tolls, fares, and charges for the use of facilities and to establish various
routes and classes of service. Rates, tolls, fares, or charges may be adjusted
or eliminated for any distinguishable class of users including, but not limited
to, senior citizens, handicapped persons, and students;

(3) To contract with
the United States or any of its agencies, any state or any of its agencies, any
metropolitan municipal corporation, any other county, city, other political
subdivision or governmental instrumentality, or governmental agency, or any
private person, firm, or corporation for the purpose of receiving gifts or
grants or securing loans or advances for preliminary planning and feasibility
studies, or for the design, construction, operation, or maintenance of public
transportation facilities, as long as contracts for the construction of
facilities with an estimated cost greater than two hundred thousand dollars are
awarded after a competitive bid process consistent with chapter 39.04 RCW or
are awarded consistent with an alternative public works contracting procedure
consistent with chapter 39.10 RCW. Contracts for construction with an
estimated cost of two hundred thousand dollars or less may be awarded pursuant
to RCW 39.04.155;

(4) To contract with
the United States or any of its agencies, any state or any of its agencies, any
metropolitan municipal corporation, any other county, city, other political
subdivision or governmental instrumentality, any governmental agency, or any
private person, firm, or corporation for the use by either contracting party of
all or any part of the facilities, structures, lands, interests in lands, air
rights over lands, and rights of way of all kinds which are owned, leased, or
held by the other party and for the purpose of planning, designing,
constructing, operating any public transportation facility, or performing any
service related to transportation which the authority is authorized to operate
or perform, on terms as may be agreed upon by the contracting parties;

(5) To acquire any
existing public transportation facility by conveyance, sale, or lease. In any
acquisition from a county, city, or other political subdivision of the state,
the authority shall receive credit from the county or city or other political
subdivision for any federal assistance and state matching assistance used by
the county or city or other political subdivision in acquiring any portion of
the public transportation facility. Upon acquisition, the authority shall
assume and observe all existing labor contracts relating to the public
transportation facility and, to the extent necessary for operation of the
public transportation facility, all of the employees of the public
transportation facility whose duties are necessary to efficiently operate the
public transportation facility shall be appointed to comparable positions to
those which they held at the time of the transfer, and no employee or retired
or pensioned employee of the public transportation facility shall be placed in
any worse position with respect to pension seniority, wages, sick leave,
vacation, or other benefits than he or she enjoyed as an employee of the public
transportation facility prior to the acquisition. Furthermore, the authority
shall engage in collective bargaining with the duly appointed representatives
of any employee labor organization having existing contracts with the acquired
facility and may enter into labor contracts with the employee labor
organization;

(6) To contract for,
participate in, and support research, demonstration, testing, and development
of public transportation facilities, equipment, and use incentives, and have
all powers necessary to comply with any criteria, standards, and regulations
which may be adopted under state and federal law, and to take all actions
necessary to meet the requirements of those laws. The authority shall have, in
addition to these powers, the authority to prepare, adopt, and carry out a
comprehensive transit plan and to make other plans and studies and to perform
programs as the authority deems necessary to implement and comply with those
laws;

(7) To establish local
improvement districts within the authority area to finance public
transportation facilities, to levy special assessments on property specially
benefited by those facilities, and to issue local improvement bonds to be
repaid by the collection of local improvement assessments. The method of
establishment, levying, collection, enforcement, and all other matters relating
to the local improvement districts, assessments, collection, and bonds shall be
as provided in the statutes governing local improvement districts of cities and
towns. The duties devolving upon the city treasurer in those statutes shall be
imposed on the treasurer of the authority;

(8) To exercise all
other powers necessary and appropriate to carry out its responsibilities,
including without limitation the power to own, construct, purchase, lease, add
to, and maintain any real and personal property or property rights necessary
for the conduct of the affairs of the authority, to enter into contracts, and
to employ the persons as the authority deems appropriate. An authority may
also sell, lease, convey, or otherwise dispose of any authority real or
personal property no longer necessary for the conduct of the affairs of the
authority.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
5. Each authority shall
establish the funds and accounts it deems necessary and appropriate. The
authority may designate a treasurer or may contract with any city with
territory within the authority area for treasury and other financial
functions. The city shall be reimbursed for the expenses of treasury
services. However, no city whose treasurer serves as treasurer of an authority
is liable for the obligations of the authority.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
6. The authority shall adopt
a public transportation plan for public transportation facilities to be
provided by the authority. The plan, and any amendments, shall be approved by
the legislative authority of each city and county, in the case of
unincorporated territory, comprising more than ten percent of the qualified
electors in the authority area. Prior to adoption of the plan, the authority
shall provide a minimum of sixty days during which sufficient public hearings
shall be held to provide interested persons an opportunity to participate in
development of the plan.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
7. Every authority has the
power to:

(1) Levy excess levies
upon the property included within the authority area, in the manner prescribed
by Article VII, section 2 of the state Constitution and by RCW 84.52.052 for
operating funds, capital outlay funds, and cumulative reserve funds;

(2) Issue general
obligation bonds, not to exceed an amount, together with any outstanding
nonvoter-approved general obligation indebtedness equal to one and one-half
percent of the value of the taxable property within the authority area, as the
term "value of the taxable property" is defined in RCW 39.36.015. An
authority may additionally issue general obligation bonds, together with
outstanding voter‑approved and nonvoter-approved general obligation
indebtedness, equal to two and one-half percent of the value of the taxable
property within the authority area, as the term "value of the taxable
property" is defined in RCW 39.36.015, when the bonds are approved by
three-fifths of the qualified electors of the authority at a general or special
election called for that purpose and may provide for the retirement thereof by
levies in excess of dollar rate limitations in accordance with the provisions
of RCW 84.52.056. These elections shall be held as provided in RCW 39.36.050;

(3) Issue revenue bonds
payable from any revenues other than taxes levied by the authority, and to
pledge those revenues for the repayment of the bonds. Proceeds of revenue
bonds may be expended for the costs of public transportation facilities, for
financing costs, and for capitalized interest during construction plus six
months thereafter. The bonds and warrants shall be issued and sold in
accordance with chapter 39.46 RCW.

Unless authorized by
the legislative authority of any city or county or by the legislature, bonds
issued by an authority are not obligations of any city, county, or the state of
Washington or any political subdivision thereof other than the authority, and
the bonds shall state.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
8. (1) Every authority has
the power to levy and collect a special excise tax not exceeding two and one-half
percent on the value of every motor vehicle owned by a resident of the
authority area for the privilege of using a motor vehicle. Before utilization
of any excise tax money collected under this section for acquisition of right
of way or construction of a public transportation facility on a separate right
of way, the authority shall adopt rules affording the public an opportunity for
corridor public hearings and design public hearings, which shall provide in
detail the procedures necessary for public participation in the following
instances: (a) Prior to adoption of location and design plans having a
substantial social, economic, or environmental effect upon the locality upon
which they are to be constructed; or (b) on the public transportation facilities
operating on a separate right of way whenever a substantial change is proposed
relating to location or design in the adopted plan. In adopting rules the
authority shall adhere to the provisions of the administrative procedure act.

(2) A "corridor public
hearing" is a public hearing that: (a) Is held before the authority is
committed to a specific route proposal for the public transportation facility,
and before a route location is established; (b) is held to afford an
opportunity for participation by those interested in the determination of the
need for, and the location of, the public transportation facility; and (c)
provides a public forum that affords a full opportunity for presenting views on
the public transportation facility route location, and the social, economic,
and environmental effects on that location and alternate locations. However,
the hearing shall not be deemed to be necessary before adoption of a
transportation plan as provided in section 6 of this act or a vote of the
qualified electors under subsection (5) of this section.

(3) A "design
public hearing" is a public hearing that: (a) Is held after the location
is established but before the design is adopted; (b) is held to afford an
opportunity for participation by those interested in the determination of major
design features of the public transportation facility; and (c) provides a
public forum to afford a full opportunity for presenting views on the public
transportation system design, and the social, economic, and environmental
effects of that design and alternate designs.

(4) An authority
imposing a tax under subsection (1) of this section may also impose a sales and
use tax, in addition to any tax authorized by RCW 82.14.030, upon retail car
rentals within the city that are taxable by the state under chapters 82.08 and
82.12 RCW. The rate of tax shall not exceed 1.944 percent of the base of the
tax. The base of the tax shall be the selling price in the case of a sales tax
or the rental value of the vehicle used in the case of a use tax. The tax
imposed under this section shall be deducted from the amount of any tax
otherwise due under RCW 82.08.020(2). The revenue collected under this
subsection shall be distributed in the same manner as sales and use taxes under
chapter 82.14 RCW.

(5) Before any
authority may impose any of the taxes authorized under this section, the
authorization for imposition of the taxes shall be approved by the qualified
electors of the authority area.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
9. (1) Every authority shall
have the power to fix and impose a fee, not to exceed one hundred dollars per
vehicle, for each vehicle that is subject to license tab fees under RCW
46.16.0621 and for each vehicle that is subject to RCW 46.16.070 with an unladen
weight of six thousand pounds or less, and that is determined by the department
of licensing to be registered within the boundaries of the authority area. The
department of licensing shall provide an exemption from the fee for any vehicle
the owner of which demonstrates is not operated within the authority area.

(2) The department of
licensing shall administer and collect the fee. The department shall deduct a
percentage amount, as provided by contract, not to exceed two percent of the
taxes collected, for administration and collection expenses incurred by it.
The remaining proceeds shall be remitted to the custody of the state treasurer
for monthly distribution to the authority.

(3) The authority
imposing this fee shall delay the effective date at least six months from the
date the fee is approved by the qualified voters of the authority area to allow
the department of licensing to implement administration and collection of the
fee.

(4) Before any
authority may impose any of the fees authorized under this section, the
authorization for imposition of the fees shall be approved by a majority of the
qualified electors of the authority area voting.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
10. (1) Every authority has
the power to impose annual regular property tax levies in an amount equal to
one dollar and fifty cents or less per thousand dollars of assessed value of
property in the authority area when specifically authorized to do so by a
majority of the voters voting on a proposition submitted at a special election
or at the regular election of the authority. A proposition authorizing the tax
levies shall not be submitted by an authority more than twice in any
twelve-month period. Ballot propositions shall conform with RCW 29.30.111.
The number of years during which the regular levy will be imposed may be
limited as specified in the ballot proposition or may be unlimited in
duration. In the event an authority is levying property taxes, which in
combination with property taxes levied by other taxing districts subject to the
one percent limitation provided for in Article 7, section 2 of the state
Constitution result in taxes in excess of the limitation provided for in RCW
84.52.043, the authority's property tax levy shall be reduced or eliminated
consistent with RCW 84.52.010.

(2) The limitation in
RCW 84.55.010 shall not apply to the first levy imposed under this section
following the approval of the levies by the voters under subsection (1) of this
section.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
11. All taxes and fees levied
and collected by an authority shall be levied and used solely for the purpose
of paying all or any part of the cost of acquiring, designing, constructing,
equipping, or operating the facilities of an authority or contracting for the
services thereof, or to pay or secure the payment of all or part of the
principal of or interest on any general obligation bonds or revenue bonds
issued for authority purposes. Until expended, money accumulated in the funds
and accounts of an authority may be invested in the manner authorized by the
governing body of the authority, consistent with state law.

If any of the revenue
from any tax or fee authorized to be levied by an authority has been pledged by
the authority to secure the payment of any bonds as herein authorized, then as
long as that pledge is in effect the legislature shall not withdraw from the
authority the authorization to levy and collect the tax or fee.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
12. The special excise tax
imposed under section 8(1) of this act shall be collected at the same time and
in the same manner as license tab fees under RCW 46.16.0621 and section 9 of
this act. Every year on January 1st, April 1st, July 1st, and October 1st the
department of licensing shall remit special excise taxes collected on behalf of
an authority, back to the authority, at no cost to the authority.

Sec. 13. RCW 84.52.010 and 1995
2nd sp.s. c 13 s 4 are each amended to read as follows:

Except as is permitted
under RCW 84.55.050, all taxes shall be levied or voted in specific amounts.

The rate percent of all
taxes for state and county purposes, and purposes of taxing districts
coextensive with the county, shall be determined, calculated and fixed by the
county assessors of the respective counties, within the limitations provided by
law, upon the assessed valuation of the property of the county, as shown by the
completed tax rolls of the county, and the rate percent of all taxes levied for
purposes of taxing districts within any county shall be determined, calculated
and fixed by the county assessors of the respective counties, within the
limitations provided by law, upon the assessed valuation of the property of the
taxing districts respectively.

When a county assessor
finds that the aggregate rate of tax levy on any property, that is subject to
the limitations set forth in RCW 84.52.043 or 84.52.050, exceeds the
limitations provided in either of these sections, the assessor shall recompute
and establish a consolidated levy in the following manner:

(1) The full certified
rates of tax levy for state, county, county road district, and city or town
purposes shall be extended on the tax rolls in amounts not exceeding the
limitations established by law; however any state levy shall take precedence
over all other levies and shall not be reduced for any purpose other than that
required by RCW 84.55.010. If, as a result of the levies imposed under RCW
84.52.069, 84.34.230, the portion of the levy by a metropolitan park district
that was protected under RCW 84.52.120, and 84.52.105, the combined rate of
regular property tax levies that are subject to the one percent limitation
exceeds one percent of the true and fair value of any property, then these
levies shall be reduced as follows: (a) The portion of the levy by a
metropolitan park district that is protected under RCW 84.52.120 shall be
reduced until the combined rate no longer exceeds one percent of the true and
fair value of any property or shall be eliminated; (b) if the combined rate of
regular property tax levies that are subject to the one percent limitation
still exceeds one percent of the true and fair value of any property, then the
levies imposed under RCW 84.34.230, 84.52.105, and any portion of the levy
imposed under RCW 84.52.069 that is in excess of thirty cents per thousand
dollars of assessed value, shall be reduced on a pro rata basis until the
combined rate no longer exceeds one percent of the true and fair value of any
property or shall be eliminated; and (c) if the combined rate of regular
property tax levies that are subject to the one percent limitation still
exceeds one percent of the true and fair value of any property, then the thirty
cents per thousand dollars of assessed value of tax levy imposed under RCW
84.52.069 shall be reduced until the combined rate no longer exceeds one
percent of the true and fair value of any property or eliminated.

(2) The certified rates
of tax levy subject to these limitations by all junior taxing districts
imposing taxes on such property shall be reduced or eliminated as follows to
bring the consolidated levy of taxes on such property within the provisions of
these limitations:

(a) First, the
certified property tax levy rates of those junior taxing districts authorized
under RCW 36.68.525, 36.69.145, section 10 of this act, and 67.38.130
shall be reduced on a pro rata basis or eliminated;

(b) Second, if the
consolidated tax levy rate still exceeds these limitations, the certified
property tax levy rates of flood control zone districts shall be reduced on a
pro rata basis or eliminated;

(c) Third, if the
consolidated tax levy rate still exceeds these limitations, the certified
property tax levy rates of all other junior taxing districts, other than fire
protection districts, library districts, the first fifty cent per thousand
dollars of assessed valuation levies for metropolitan park districts, and the
first fifty cent per thousand dollars of assessed valuation levies for public
hospital districts, shall be reduced on a pro rata basis or eliminated;

(d) Fourth, if the
consolidated tax levy rate still exceeds these limitations, the certified
property tax levy rates authorized to fire protection districts under RCW
52.16.140 and 52.16.160 shall be reduced on a pro rata basis or eliminated; and

(e) Fifth, if the
consolidated tax levy rate still exceeds these limitations, the certified
property tax levy rates authorized for fire protection districts under RCW
52.16.130, library districts, metropolitan park districts under their first
fifty cent per thousand dollars of assessed valuation levy, and public hospital
districts under their first fifty cent per thousand dollars of assessed
valuation levy, shall be reduced on a pro rata basis or eliminated.

In determining whether
the aggregate rate of tax levy on any property, that is subject to the
limitations set forth in RCW 84.52.050, exceeds the limitations provided in
that section, the assessor shall use the hypothetical state levy, as
apportioned to the county under RCW 84.48.080, that was computed under RCW
84.48.080 without regard to the reduction under RCW 84.55.012.

Sec. 14. RCW 84.52.052 and 1996 c
230 s 1615 are each amended to read as follows:

The limitations imposed
by RCW 84.52.050 through 84.52.056, and RCW 84.52.043 shall not prevent the
levy of additional taxes by any taxing district except school districts in
which a larger levy is necessary in order to prevent the impairment of the
obligation of contracts. As used in this section, the term "taxing
district" means any county, metropolitan park district, park and
recreation service area, park and recreation district, water-sewer district,
solid waste disposal district, public facilities district, flood control zone
district, county rail district, service district, public hospital district,
road district, rural county library district, island library district, rural
partial-county library district, intercounty rural library district, fire protection
district, cemetery district, city, town, transportation benefit district,
emergency medical service district with a population density of less than one
thousand per square mile, ((or)) cultural arts, stadium, and convention
district, or city transportation authority.

Any such taxing
district may levy taxes at a rate in excess of the rate specified in RCW
84.52.050 through 84.52.056 and 84.52.043, or 84.55.010 through 84.55.050, when
authorized so to do by the voters of such taxing district in the manner set
forth in Article VII, section 2(a) of the Constitution of this state at a
special or general election to be held in the year in which the levy is made.

A special election may
be called and the time therefor fixed by the county legislative authority, or
council, board of commissioners, or other governing body of any such taxing
district, by giving notice thereof by publication in the manner provided by law
for giving notices of general elections, at which special election the
proposition authorizing such excess levy shall be submitted in such form as to
enable the voters favoring the proposition to vote "yes" and those
opposed thereto to vote "no."

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 15. Sections 1 through 12 of
this act constitute a new chapter in Title 36 RCW.

---
END ---