BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF
WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec.
1. A new section is added
to chapter 28B.20 RCW to read as follows:

The student regent of
the University of Washington appointed by the governor shall be held
accountable and responsible for that which is ordained by the governing body of
the associated students of the University of Washington.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
2. A new section is added
to chapter 28B.20 RCW to read as follows:

In the event that the
student regent has not maintained the expectations ordained by the governing
body of the associated students of the University of Washington and upon
majority approval of such governing body, the student regent shall be removed
from office and the governing body shall submit three alternative names to the
governor for appointment.

Sec. 3. RCW 28B.20.100 and 1998
c 95 s 1 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) The governance of
the University of Washington shall be vested in a board of regents to consist
of ten members, one of whom shall be a student. The governor shall select the
student member from a list of candidates, of at least three and not more than
five, ((submitted by the governing body of the associated students)) elected
by the associated students of the University of Washington. They shall be
appointed by the governor with the consent of the senate, and, except for the
student member, shall hold their offices for a term of six years from the first
day of October and until their successors shall be appointed and qualified.
The student member shall hold his or her office for a term of one year from the
first day of June until his or her successor is appointed and qualified. The
student member shall be a full-time student in good standing at the university
at the time of appointment.

(2) Six members of said
board shall constitute a quorum for the transaction of business. In the case
of a vacancy, or when an appointment is made after the date of the expiration
of a term, the governor shall fill the vacancy for the remainder of the term of
the regent whose office has become vacant or expired.

(3) Except for the term
of the student member, no more than the terms of two members will expire
simultaneously on the last day of September in any one year.

(4) A
student appointed under this section shall excuse himself or herself from
participation or voting on matters relating to the hiring, discipline, or
tenure of faculty members and personnel.

---
END ---