BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF
WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec.
1. After the tragic events
of September 11, 2001, the legislature recognizes that the state's and the
region's security, economic prosperity, and social well-being depend on the
reliable functioning of increasingly complex infrastructures. The legislature further
recognizes that it is the government's responsibility to participate in and
facilitate the development of a regional approach to protecting this state's
and the region's critical infrastructures. Because of mutual dependence and
the increasing interconnectedness of infrastructures for energy systems, water
systems, transportation systems, and communications systems, these
infrastructures may be vulnerable in ways not yet recognized. Many of these
facilities are privately owned and operated. In developing a coordinated
regional approach to protecting critical infrastructures, it is important to
include a broad set of viewpoints and expertise from both the public and
private sector.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
2. A new section is added
to chapter 38.52 RCW to read as follows:

(1) The military
department shall develop a plan for the identification, assessment, and
prioritization of protection for infrastructure that is critical to state and
regional economic stability and security. This plan shall be developed by the
military department with participation as needed from the emergency management
council and its subcommittees and from the department of community, trade, and
economic development, department of information systems, Washington state
patrol, department of transportation, utilities and transportation commission,
department of health, department of ecology, and any other agencies the
military department deems necessary for plan development.

(2) In developing the
plan required by this section, the military department shall study, evaluate,
and make recommendations on methods to:

(a) Identify the
appropriate types of infrastructure to be considered critical to state and
regional economic stability and security;

(b) Identify the types
of information needed and the public and private sector sources of information
essential to identifying infrastructures critical to economic stability and
security;

(c) Assess the
vulnerability of the various critical infrastructures identified; and

(d) Prioritize those
infrastructures most in need of protection.

(3) The council shall
submit the plan required by this section to the governor and the appropriate
committees of the legislature no later than December 1, 2002.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
3. A new section is added
to chapter 38.52 RCW to read as follows:

Within its existing
resources and to the extent practicable, the military department and other
state agencies identified in section 2(1) of this act shall participate in any
efforts by public or private sector interests to develop regional plans for
management and restoration of critical functions. Participation may require
coordination with other states, federal agencies, and neighboring nations.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 4. This act expires July 1,
2004.

---
END ---