BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF
WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec.
1. Following the tragic
events of September 11, 2001, the government's primary role in protecting the
health, safety, and well-being of its citizens has been underscored. The
threat of biological and chemical agents used for terrorism creates new and
emerging dangers for public health and raises the possibility of mass civilian
exposures and casualties. In addition, the September 11th attacks demonstrated
that other types of terrorist attacks may create public health emergencies for
victims, rescue personnel, government agencies, and the public.

The legislature finds
there is a need to focus on the prevention, detection, management, and
containment of public health emergencies from infectious diseases. The
legislature also finds that an effective communications system is needed to
ensure that health care providers across the state can quickly and efficiently
notify and communicate with each other regarding signs and symptoms they may
observe that may be the earliest indications of bioterrorism and
terrorist-related public health emergencies. The legislature also finds that
dissemination of public health information during an emergency is critical to
the functioning and well-being of the public. The legislature further finds
that there is a need to coordinate planning among government agencies to ensure
an effective response to bioterrorism incidents or other terrorist attacks.
The legislature recognizes that the department of health and human services has
recently awarded funding to the department of health to develop a comprehensive
bioterrorism plan and to improve and expand disease surveillance and
investigation, communication, public health laboratory capacity, and hospital
system readiness.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
2. A new section is added
to chapter 43.70 RCW to read as follows:

(1) The department
shall be designated as the coordinator of the state bioterrorism preparedness
and response program. By July 2, 2002, the department shall prepare a plan for
improving current preparedness and response for a bioterrorist event or other
public health emergency. The plan shall address:

(a) Improvements to the
communicable disease surveillance and investigation system, in a manner
consistent with existing systems established under chapter 70.05 RCW and the
rules of the state board of health;

(b) Additional methods
of communication, including but not limited to an internet-based bioterrorism
communications system for licensed health care professionals, to allow
communication with and among local, state, and federal agencies, health care
professionals, hospitals, and the public during a public health emergency; and

(c) Other measures
necessary to detect and respond to a public health emergency, including but not
limited to guidelines for the safe and effective management of persons
isolated, quarantined, vaccinated, or treated during a public health emergency.

(2) The department
shall also compare state statutes and regulations with federal requirements to
determine whether statutory changes are necessary to meet federal requirements
or address the unique needs of Washington state.

(3) Integration,
coordination, and cross-agency collaboration are essential to the development
of the plan. In developing and implementing the plan, the department shall
coordinate with and involve representatives of the emergency management
council, local health jurisdictions, other federal, state, and local agencies,
health care providers, and hospitals.

(4) The plan developed
according to this act must be consistent with the state comprehensive
management plan under chapter 38.52 RCW.

(5) The department
shall submit the state plan to the federal department of health and human
services by March 15, 2002, and no later than April 15, 2002. If the deadline
for plan submission is extended, the department shall submit the state plan no
later than the subsequent deadline established by the federal department of
health and human services.

(6) The department
shall submit the completed plan, the results of the analysis conducted under
subsection (2) of this section, and any recommended statutory changes necessary
to implement the plan to the legislature no later than December 1, 2002.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
3. A new section is added
to chapter 43.70 RCW to read as follows:

If any part of this act
is found to be in conflict with federal requirements which are a prescribed
condition to the allocation of federal funds to the state, the conflicting part
of this act is hereby declared to be inoperative solely to the extent of the
conflict and with respect to the agencies directly affected, and such finding
or determination shall not affect the operation of the remainder of this act in
its application to the agencies concerned. The plan created under this act
shall meet federal requirements which are a necessary condition to the receipt
of federal funds by the state.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
4. This act is necessary for
the immediate preservation of the public peace, health, or safety, or support
of the state government and its existing public institutions, and takes effect
immediately.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 5. This act expires June 30,
2003.

---
END ---