BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF
WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec.
1. The legislature finds
that many small businesses in the state are frustrated by the complexity of the
regulatory system. The Washington Administrative Code containing agency rules
now fills twelve volumes, and appears to be growing each year. While the vast
majority of small businesses make a good faith attempt to comply with
applicable laws and rules, many find it extremely difficult to keep up with
agencies' issuance of new rules and requirements. Therefore, state agencies
are directed to make a good faith attempt to notify businesses affected by rule
changes that may subject noncomplying businesses to penalties. Further, the
legislature finds that requiring the governor's signatures on new agency rules
will promote accountability and reduce future regulatory burdens on small
businesses. Finally, the legislature finds that small businesses lack the
resources that state agencies routinely use in defending administrative rules
that may have been adopted unlawfully, without regard to proper administrative
procedures, or which exceed an agency's statutory authority. The legislature
therefore finds that it is necessary to place the burden of demonstrating that
new administrative rules are adopted in a lawful manner upon the adopting
agency.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
2. A new section is added
to chapter 34.05 RCW to read as follows:

Within two hundred days
of the effective date of a rule that imposes additional requirements on
businesses the violation of which subjects the business to a penalty,
assessment, or administrative sanction, an agency shall make a good faith
effort to notify businesses affected by the rule of the requirements of the
rule and how to obtain technical assistance to comply. For purposes of this
section, "good faith" means: (1) The agency at least notifies
businesses in the standard industrial classifications or their successor
identified in the rule-making file as businesses affected by the rule that are
registered with the department of revenue; or (2) for rules imposing additional
requirements only on persons or firms licensed, registered, or operating under
a permit, the agency notifies those persons or firms holding the license,
registration, or permit. The notification must announce the rule change, briefly
summarize the rule change, and include a contact for more information.
Notification may be by individual notice, agency bulletins or newsletters, or
any other means that will reasonably inform affected businesses. Failure to
notify a specific business under this section does not invalidate a rule or
waive the requirement to comply with the rule.

Sec. 3. RCW 34.05.360 and 1988 c
288 s 311 are each amended to read as follows:

The order of adoption
by which each rule is adopted by an agency shall contain all of the following:

(1) The signature of
the governor;

(2) The date the
agency adopted the rule;

(((2))) (3)
A concise statement of the purpose of the rule;

(((3))) (4)
A reference to all rules repealed, amended, or suspended by the rule;

(((4))) (5)
A reference to the specific statutory or other authority authorizing adoption
of the rule;

(((5))) (6)
Any findings required by any provision of law as a precondition to adoption or
effectiveness of the rule; and

(((6))) (7)
The effective date of the rule if other than that specified in RCW
34.05.380(2).

Sec. 4. RCW 34.05.570 and 1995 c
403 s 802 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) Generally. Except
to the extent that this chapter or another statute provides otherwise:

(a) Except as
provided in subsection (2) of this section and except that an agency bears the
burden of demonstrating that the agency action was authorized by law, the
burden of demonstrating the invalidity of agency action is on the party
asserting invalidity;

(b) The validity of
agency action shall be determined in accordance with the standards of review
provided in this section, as applied to the agency action at the time it was
taken;

(c) The court shall
make a separate and distinct ruling on each material issue on which the court's
decision is based; and

(d) The court shall
grant relief only if it determines that a person seeking judicial relief has
been substantially prejudiced by the action complained of.

(2) Review of rules.
(a) A rule may be reviewed by petition for declaratory judgment filed pursuant
to this subsection or in the context of any other review proceeding under this
section. In an action challenging the validity of a rule, the agency shall be
made a party to the proceeding.

(b) The validity of any
rule may be determined upon petition for a declaratory judgment addressed to
the superior court of Thurston county, when it appears that the rule, or its
threatened application, interferes with or impairs or immediately threatens to
interfere with or impair the legal rights or privileges of the petitioner. When
the validity of a rule is challenged, after the petitioner has identified the
defects in the rule, the burden of going forward with the evidence is on the
agency. The declaratory judgment order may be entered whether or not the
petitioner has first requested the agency to pass upon the validity of the rule
in question.

(c) In a proceeding
involving review of a rule, the court shall declare the rule invalid only if it
finds that: The rule violates constitutional provisions; the rule exceeds the
statutory authority of the agency; the rule was adopted without compliance with
statutory rule-making procedures; or the rule is arbitrary and capricious.

(3) Review of agency
orders in adjudicative proceedings. The court shall grant relief from an
agency order in an adjudicative proceeding only if it determines that:

(a) The order, or the
statute or rule on which the order is based, is in violation of constitutional
provisions on its face or as applied;

(b) The order is
outside the statutory authority or jurisdiction of the agency conferred by any
provision of law;

(c) The agency has
engaged in unlawful procedure or decision-making process, or has failed to
follow a prescribed procedure;

(d) The agency has
erroneously interpreted or applied the law;

(e) The order is not
supported by evidence that is substantial when viewed in light of the whole
record before the court, which includes the agency record for judicial review,
supplemented by any additional evidence received by the court under this
chapter;

(f) The agency has not
decided all issues requiring resolution by the agency;

(g) A motion for
disqualification under RCW 34.05.425 or 34.12.050 was made and was improperly
denied or, if no motion was made, facts are shown to support the grant of such
a motion that were not known and were not reasonably discoverable by the
challenging party at the appropriate time for making such a motion;

(h) The order is
inconsistent with a rule of the agency unless the agency explains the
inconsistency by stating facts and reasons to demonstrate a rational basis for
inconsistency; ((or))

(i) The order is
arbitrary or capricious; or

(j) The order is
based on a de facto rule.

(4) Review of other
agency action.

(a) All agency action
not reviewable under subsection (2) or (3) of this section shall be reviewed
under this subsection.

(b) A person whose
rights are violated by an agency's failure to perform a duty that is required
by law to be performed may file a petition for review pursuant to RCW
34.05.514, seeking an order pursuant to this subsection requiring performance.
Within twenty days after service of the petition for review, the agency shall
file and serve an answer to the petition, made in the same manner as an answer
to a complaint in a civil action. The court may hear evidence, pursuant to RCW
34.05.562, on material issues of fact raised by the petition and answer.

(c) Relief for persons
aggrieved by the performance of an agency action, including the exercise of
discretion, or an action under (b) of this subsection can be granted only if
the court determines that the action is:

(i) Unconstitutional;

(ii) Outside the
statutory authority of the agency or the authority conferred by a provision of
law;

(iii) Arbitrary or
capricious; ((or))

(iv) Taken by persons
who were not properly constituted as agency officials lawfully entitled to take
such action; or

(v)
Based on a de facto rule.

---
END ---