BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF
WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec.
1. (1) The legislative
authority of a county may establish an unincorporated area service district
within the county for the purpose of providing services to persons residing
within the unincorporated area of the county. The district may not include any
area within the corporate limits of a city or town.

(2) An unincorporated
area service district is a quasi‑municipal corporation, an independent
taxing "authority" within the meaning of Article VII, section 1 of
the state Constitution, and a "taxing district" within the meaning of
Article VII, section 2 of the state Constitution.

(3) An unincorporated
area service district constitutes a body corporate and possesses all the usual
powers of a corporation for public purposes as well as all other powers that
may now or hereafter be specifically conferred by statute including, but not
limited to, the authority to hire employees, staff, and services, to enter into
contracts, to acquire, hold, and dispose of real and personal property, and to
sue and be sued.

(4) The county
legislative authority is the governing body of an unincorporated area service
district. The county treasurer shall act as the ex officio treasurer of the
unincorporated area service district. The electors of an unincorporated area
service district are all registered voters residing within the district.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
2. A county legislative may
adopt a resolution providing for the submission of a proposal to establish an
unincorporated area service district. A proposition to create an
unincorporated area service district shall be submitted to the affected voters
at the next general election held sixty or more days after the adoption of the
resolution providing for the submittal by the county legislative authority.
The district shall be created upon approval of the proposition by simple
majority vote.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
3. The legislative authority
of an unincorporated area service district may submit an authorizing
proposition to its voters and, if approved by a majority of persons voting, may
impose a regular property tax levy not to exceed thirty cents per thousand
dollars of assessed value of taxable property within the unincorporated area
service district. The unincorporated area service district may in subsequent
years impose a levy in the same amount or a lesser amount without voter
approval. The limitations in RCW 84.52.043 do not apply to the levy authorized
in this section.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
4. The legislative authority
of an unincorporated area service district is authorized to contract with the
county within which it is located for the provision of services to persons
residing within the unincorporated area of the county.

Sec. 5. RCW 84.52.043 and 1995 c
99 s 3 are each amended to read as follows:

Within and subject to
the limitations imposed by RCW 84.52.050 as amended, the regular ad valorem tax
levies upon real and personal property by the taxing districts hereafter named
shall be as follows:

(1) Levies of the
senior taxing districts shall be as follows: (a) The levy by the state shall
not exceed three dollars and ((sixty)) thirty cents per thousand
dollars of assessed value adjusted to the state equalized value in accordance
with the indicated ratio fixed by the state department of revenue to be used
exclusively for the support of the common schools; (b) the levy by any county
shall not exceed one dollar and eighty cents per thousand dollars of assessed
value; (c) the levy by any road district shall not exceed two dollars and
twenty-five cents per thousand dollars of assessed value; ((and)) (d)
the levy by any city or town shall not exceed three dollars and thirty-seven
and one-half cents per thousand dollars of assessed value; and (e) the levy
by any unincorporated area service district shall not exceed thirty cents per
thousand dollars of assessed value. ((However))

(2) Notwithstanding
subsection (1) of this section, any county is hereby authorized to increase
its levy from one dollar and eighty cents to a rate not to exceed two dollars
and forty-seven and one-half cents per thousand dollars of assessed value for
general county purposes if the total levies for both the county and any road
district within the county do not exceed four dollars and five cents per
thousand dollars of assessed value, and no other taxing district has its levy
reduced as a result of the increased county levy.

(((2))) (3)
Notwithstanding subsection (1) of this section, the legislative authority of
any city or town may submit an authorizing proposition to its voters, and if
approved by a majority of persons voting, may increase its levy from three
dollars and thirty-seven and one-half cents to a rate not to exceed three
dollars and sixty-seven and one-half cents per thousand dollars of assessed
value of taxable property within the city or town. The city or town may in
subsequent years impose a levy in the same amount or a lesser amount without
voter approval.

(4) The
aggregate levies of junior taxing districts and senior taxing districts, other
than the state, shall not exceed five dollars and ninety cents per thousand
dollars of assessed valuation. The term "junior taxing districts"
includes all taxing districts other than the state, counties, road districts,
cities, towns, port districts, and public utility districts. The limitations
provided in this subsection shall not apply to: (a) Levies at the rates
provided by existing law by or for any port or public utility district; (b)
excess property tax levies authorized in Article VII, section 2 of the state
Constitution; (c) levies for acquiring conservation futures as authorized under
RCW 84.34.230; (d) levies for emergency medical care or emergency medical
services imposed under RCW 84.52.069; (e) levies to finance affordable housing
for very low-income housing imposed under RCW 84.52.105; ((and)) (f) the
portions of levies by metropolitan park districts that are protected under RCW
84.52.120; and (g) unincorporated area service district levies under section
3 of this act.

Sec. 6. RCW 84.52.010 and 1995
2nd sp.s. c 13 s 4 are each amended to read as follows:

Except as is permitted
under RCW 84.55.050, all taxes shall be levied or voted in specific amounts.

The rate percent of all
taxes for state and county purposes, and purposes of taxing districts
coextensive with the county, shall be determined, calculated and fixed by the
county assessors of the respective counties, within the limitations provided by
law, upon the assessed valuation of the property of the county, as shown by the
completed tax rolls of the county, and the rate percent of all taxes levied for
purposes of taxing districts within any county shall be determined, calculated
and fixed by the county assessors of the respective counties, within the
limitations provided by law, upon the assessed valuation of the property of the
taxing districts respectively.

When a county assessor
finds that the aggregate rate of tax levy on any property, that is subject to
the limitations set forth in RCW 84.52.043 or 84.52.050, exceeds the
limitations provided in either of these sections, the assessor shall recompute
and establish a consolidated levy in the following manner:

(1) The full certified
rates of tax levy for state, county, county road district, and city or town
purposes shall be extended on the tax rolls in amounts not exceeding the
limitations established by law; however any state levy shall take precedence
over all other levies and shall not be reduced for any purpose other than that
required by RCW 84.55.010. If, as a result of the levies imposed under RCW
84.52.069, 84.34.230, the portion of the levy by a metropolitan park district
that was protected under RCW 84.52.120, and 84.52.105, the combined rate of
regular property tax levies that are subject to the one percent limitation
exceeds one percent of the true and fair value of any property, then these
levies shall be reduced as follows: (a) The portion of the levy by a city
or town that exceeds three dollars and thirty-seven and one-half cents per
thousand dollars of assessed value, the levy imposed by an unincorporated area
service district shall be reduced on a pro rata basis until the combined rate
no longer exceeds one percent of the true and fair value of any property or
shall be eliminated; (b) if the combined rate of regular property tax levies
that are subject to the one percent limitation still exceeds one percent of the
true and fair value of any property, then the portion of the levy by a
metropolitan park district that is protected under RCW 84.52.120 shall be
reduced until the combined rate no longer exceeds one percent of the true and
fair value of any property or shall be eliminated; (((b))) (c) if
the combined rate of regular property tax levies that are subject to the one
percent limitation still exceeds one percent of the true and fair value of any
property, then the levies imposed under RCW 84.34.230, 84.52.105, and any
portion of the levy imposed under RCW 84.52.069 that is in excess of thirty
cents per thousand dollars of assessed value, shall be reduced on a pro rata
basis until the combined rate no longer exceeds one percent of the true and
fair value of any property or shall be eliminated; and (((c))) (d)
if the combined rate of regular property tax levies that are subject to the one
percent limitation still exceeds one percent of the true and fair value of any
property, then the thirty cents per thousand dollars of assessed value of tax
levy imposed under RCW 84.52.069 shall be reduced until the combined rate no
longer exceeds one percent of the true and fair value of any property or
eliminated.

(2) The certified rates
of tax levy subject to these limitations by all junior taxing districts
imposing taxes on such property shall be reduced or eliminated as follows to
bring the consolidated levy of taxes on such property within the provisions of
these limitations:

(a) First, the
certified property tax levy rates of those junior taxing districts authorized
under RCW 36.68.525, 36.69.145, and 67.38.130 shall be reduced on a pro rata
basis or eliminated;

(b) Second, if the
consolidated tax levy rate still exceeds these limitations, the certified
property tax levy rates of flood control zone districts shall be reduced on a
pro rata basis or eliminated;

(c) Third, if the
consolidated tax levy rate still exceeds these limitations, the certified
property tax levy rates of all other junior taxing districts, other than fire
protection districts, library districts, the first fifty cent per thousand
dollars of assessed valuation levies for metropolitan park districts, and the
first fifty cent per thousand dollars of assessed valuation levies for public
hospital districts, shall be reduced on a pro rata basis or eliminated;

(d) Fourth, if the
consolidated tax levy rate still exceeds these limitations, the certified
property tax levy rates authorized to fire protection districts under RCW
52.16.140 and 52.16.160 shall be reduced on a pro rata basis or eliminated; and

(e) Fifth, if the
consolidated tax levy rate still exceeds these limitations, the certified
property tax levy rates authorized for fire protection districts under RCW
52.16.130, library districts, metropolitan park districts under their first
fifty cent per thousand dollars of assessed valuation levy, and public hospital
districts under their first fifty cent per thousand dollars of assessed
valuation levy, shall be reduced on a pro rata basis or eliminated.

In determining whether
the aggregate rate of tax levy on any property, that is subject to the
limitations set forth in RCW 84.52.050, exceeds the limitations provided in
that section, the assessor shall use the hypothetical state levy, as
apportioned to the county under RCW 84.48.080, that was computed under RCW
84.48.080 without regard to the reduction under RCW 84.55.012.

Sec. 7. RCW 84.52.065 and 1991
sp.s. c 31 s 16 are each amended to read as follows:

Subject to the limitations
in RCW 84.55.010, in each year the state shall levy for collection in the
following year for the support of common schools of the state a tax of three
dollars and ((sixty)) thirty cents per thousand dollars of
assessed value upon the assessed valuation of all taxable property within the
state adjusted to the state equalized value in accordance with the indicated
ratio fixed by the state department of revenue.

As used in this section,
"the support of common schools" includes the payment of the principal
and interest on bonds issued for capital construction projects for the common
schools.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 8. Sections 1 through 4 of
this act shall constitute a new chapter in Title 36 RCW.

---
END ---