BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF
WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1. RCW 84.55.050 and 1989 c
287 s 1 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) Subject to any
otherwise applicable statutory dollar rate limitations, regular property taxes
may be levied by or for a taxing district in an amount exceeding the
limitations provided for in this chapter if such levy is authorized by a
proposition approved by a majority of the voters of the taxing district voting
on the proposition at a general election held within the district or at a
special election within the taxing district called by the district for the
purpose of submitting such proposition to the voters. Any election held
pursuant to this section shall be held not more than twelve months prior to the
date on which the proposed levy is to be made, except as provided in subsection
(3)(b) of this section. The ballot of the proposition shall state the
dollar rate proposed and shall clearly state any conditions which are
applicable under subsection (3) of this section.

(2) After a levy
authorized pursuant to this section is made, the dollar amount of such levy
shall be used for the purpose of computing the limitations for subsequent
levies provided for in this chapter, except as provided in subsections (3)
and (4) of this section.

(3) A proposition
placed before the voters under this section may:

(a) Limit the period
for which the increased levy is to be made;

(b) Authorize annual
increases in levies for multiple consecutive years, up to ten consecutive
years, during which period each year's authorized maximum legal levy shall be
used as the base upon which an increased levy limit for the succeeding year is
computed, but the ballot proposition must state the dollar rate proposed only
for the first year of the consecutive years and must state the percentage, or a
specified index to be used for determining a percentage, such as the consumer
price index, which need not be the same for all years, by which the regular tax
levy for the district may be increased in each of the subsequent consecutive
years;

(c) Limit the
purpose for which the increased levy is to be made, but if the limited purpose
includes making redemption payments on bonds, the period for which the
increased levies are made shall not exceed nine years;

(((c))) (d)
Set the levy at a rate less than the maximum rate allowed for the district;

(e) Provide that the
maximum allowable dollar amount of the final annual levy of the period
specified in the measure shall be used to compute the limitations provided for
in this chapter on levy increases occurring after the expiration of the period;
or

(((d))) (f)
Include any combination of the conditions in this subsection.

(4) Except as
otherwise provided in an approved ballot measure under this section, after
the expiration of a limited period or the satisfaction of a limited purpose,
whichever comes first, subsequent levies shall be computed as if:

(a) The limited
proposition under subsection (3) of this section had not been approved; and

(b) The
taxing district had made levies at the maximum rates which would otherwise have
been allowed under this chapter during the years levies were made under the
limited proposition.

--- END ---