BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF
WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1. RCW 36.70A.140 and 1995
c 347 s 107 are each amended to read as follows:

Each county and city
that is required or chooses to plan under RCW 36.70A.040 shall establish and
broadly disseminate to the public a public participation program identifying
procedures providing for early and continuous public participation in the
development and amendment of comprehensive land use plans and development
regulations implementing such plans. The procedures shall provide for broad
dissemination of proposals and alternatives, opportunity for written comments,
public meetings after effective notice, provision for open discussion,
communication programs, information services, and consideration of and response
to public comments. ((In enacting legislation in response to the board's
decision pursuant to RCW 36.70A.300 declaring part or all of a comprehensive
plan or development regulation invalid, the county or city shall provide for
public participation that is appropriate and effective under the circumstances
presented by the board's order.)) Errors in exact compliance with the
established program and procedures shall not render the comprehensive land use
plan or development regulations invalid if the spirit of the program and
procedures is observed.

Sec. 2. RCW 36.70A.280 and 1996
c 325 s 2 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) A growth management
hearings board shall hear and determine only those petitions alleging either:

(a) That a state
agency, county, or city planning under this chapter is not in procedural
compliance with the requirements of this chapter, chapter 90.58 RCW as it
relates to the adoption of shoreline master programs or amendments thereto, or
chapter 43.21C RCW as it relates to plans, development regulations, or
amendments, adopted under RCW 36.70A.040 or chapter 90.58 RCW; or

(b) That the
twenty-year growth management planning population projections adopted by the
office of financial management pursuant to RCW 43.62.035 should be adjusted.

(2) A petition may be
filed only by: (a) The state, or a county or city that plans under this
chapter; (b) a person who has participated orally or in writing before the
county or city regarding the matter on which a review is being requested; (c) a
person who is certified by the governor within sixty days of filing the request
with the board; or (d) a person qualified pursuant to RCW 34.05.530.

(3) For purposes of
this section "person" means any individual, partnership, corporation,
association, state agency, governmental subdivision or unit thereof, or public
or private organization or entity of any character.

(4) When considering a possible
adjustment to a growth management planning population projection prepared by
the office of financial management, a board shall consider the implications of
any such adjustment to the population forecast for the entire state.

The rationale for any
adjustment that is adopted by a board must be documented and filed with the
office of financial management within ten working days after adoption.

If adjusted by a board,
a county growth management planning population projection shall only be used
for the planning purposes set forth in this chapter and shall be known as a
"board adjusted population projection". None of these changes shall
affect the official state and county population forecasts prepared by the
office of financial management, which shall continue to be used for state
budget and planning purposes.

Sec. 3. RCW 36.70A.290 and 1997
c 429 s 12 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) All requests for
review to a growth management hearings board shall be initiated by filing a
petition that includes a detailed statement of issues presented for resolution
by the board. The board shall render written decisions articulating the basis
for its holdings. The board shall not issue advisory opinions on issues not
presented to the board in the statement of issues, as modified by any
prehearing order.

(2) All petitions
relating to whether or not an adopted comprehensive plan, development regulation,
or permanent amendment thereto, is in procedural compliance with the
goals and requirements of this chapter or chapter 90.58 or 43.21C RCW must be
filed within sixty days after publication by the legislative bodies of the
county or city.

(a) Except as provided
in (c) of this subsection, the date of publication for a city shall be the date
the city publishes the ordinance, or summary of the ordinance, adopting the
comprehensive plan or development regulations, or amendment thereto, as is
required to be published.

(b) Promptly after
adoption, a county shall publish a notice that it has adopted the comprehensive
plan or development regulations, or amendment thereto.

Except as provided in
(c) of this subsection, for purposes of this section the date of publication
for a county shall be the date the county publishes the notice that it has
adopted the comprehensive plan or development regulations, or amendment
thereto.

(c) For local
governments planning under RCW 36.70A.040, promptly after approval or disapproval
of a local government’s shoreline master program or amendment thereto by the
department of ecology as provided in RCW 90.58.090, the local government shall
publish a notice that the shoreline master program or amendment thereto has
been approved or disapproved by the department of ecology. For purposes of
this section, the date of publication for the adoption or amendment of a
shoreline master program is the date the local government publishes notice that
the shoreline master program or amendment thereto has been approved or
disapproved by the department of ecology.

(3) Unless the board
dismisses the petition as frivolous or finds that the person filing the
petition lacks standing, or the parties have filed an agreement to have the
case heard in superior court as provided in RCW 36.70A.295, the board shall,
within ten days of receipt of the petition, set a time for hearing the matter.

(4) The board shall
base its decision on the record developed by the city, county, or the state and
supplemented with additional evidence if the board determines that such
additional evidence would be necessary or of substantial assistance to the
board in reaching its decision.

(5) The board, shall
consolidate, when appropriate, all petitions involving the review of the same
comprehensive plan or the same development regulation or regulations.

Sec. 4. RCW 36.70A.295 and 1997
c 429 s 13 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) The superior court
may directly review a petition for review filed under RCW 36.70A.290 if all
parties to the proceeding before the board have agreed to direct review in the
superior court. The agreement of the parties shall be in writing and signed by
all of the parties to the proceeding or their designated representatives. The
agreement shall include the parties' agreement to proper venue as provided in
RCW 36.70A.300(5). The parties shall file their agreement with the board
within ten days after the date the petition is filed, or if multiple petitions
have been filed and the board has consolidated the petitions pursuant to RCW
36.70A.300, within ten days after the board serves its order of consolidation.

(2) Within ten days of
receiving the timely and complete agreement of the parties, the board shall
file a certificate of agreement with the designated superior court and shall
serve the parties with copies of the certificate. The superior court shall
obtain exclusive jurisdiction over a petition when it receives the certificate
of agreement. With the certificate of agreement the board shall also file the
petition for review, any orders entered by the board, all other documents in
the board's files regarding the action, and the written agreement of the
parties.

(3) For purposes of a
petition that is subject to direct review, the superior court's subject matter
jurisdiction shall be equivalent to that of the board. Consistent with the
requirements of the superior court civil rules, the superior court may
consolidate a petition subject to direct review under this section with a
separate action filed in the superior court.

(4)(a) Except as
otherwise provided in (b) and (c) of this subsection, the provisions of RCW
36.70A.280 through 36.70A.330, which specify the nature and extent of board
review, shall apply to the superior court's review.

(b) The superior court:

(i) Shall not have
jurisdiction to directly review or modify an office of financial management
population projection;

(ii) Except as
otherwise provided in RCW 36.70A.300(2)(b), shall render its decision on the
petition within one hundred eighty days of receiving the certification of
agreement; and

(iii) Shall give a procedural
compliance hearing under RCW 36.70A.330(2) the highest priority of all civil
matters before the court.

(c) An aggrieved party
may secure appellate review of a final judgment of the superior court under
this section by the supreme court or the court of appeals. The review shall be
secured in the manner provided by law for review of superior court decisions in
other civil cases.

(5) If, following a procedural
compliance hearing, the court finds that the state agency, county, or city is
not in compliance with the court's prior order, the court may use its remedial
and contempt powers to enforce compliance.

(6) The superior court shall
transmit a copy of its decision and order on direct review to the board, the
department, and the governor. If the court has determined that a county or
city is not in procedural compliance with the provisions of this
chapter, the governor may impose sanctions against the county or city in the
same manner as if a board had recommended the imposition of sanctions as
provided in RCW 36.70A.330.

(7) After the court has
assumed jurisdiction over a petition for review under this section, the
superior court civil rules shall govern a request for intervention and all
other procedural matters not specifically provided for in this section.

Sec. 5. RCW 36.70A.300 and 1997
c 429 s 14 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) The board shall
issue a final order that shall be based exclusively on whether or not a state
agency, county, or city is in procedural compliance with the
requirements of this chapter, chapter 90.58 RCW as it relates to adoption or
amendment of shoreline master programs, or chapter 43.21C RCW as it relates to
adoption of plans, development regulations, and amendments thereto, under RCW
36.70A.040 or chapter 90.58 RCW.

(2)(a) Except as
provided in (b) of this subsection, the final order shall be issued within one
hundred eighty days of receipt of the petition for review, or, if multiple
petitions are filed, within one hundred eighty days of receipt of the last
petition that is consolidated.

(b) The board may
extend the period of time for issuing a decision to enable the parties to
settle the dispute if additional time is necessary to achieve a settlement, and
(i) an extension is requested by all parties, or (ii) an extension is requested
by the petitioner and respondent and the board determines that a negotiated
settlement between the remaining parties could resolve significant issues in
dispute. The request must be filed with the board not later than seven days
before the date scheduled for the hearing on the merits of the petition. The
board may authorize one or more extensions for up to ninety days each, subject
to the requirements of this section.

(3) In the final order,
the board shall either:

(a) Find that the state
agency, county, or city is in procedural compliance with the
requirements of this chapter, chapter 90.58 RCW as it relates to the adoption
or amendment of shoreline master programs, or chapter 43.21C RCW as it relates
to adoption of plans, development regulations, and amendments thereto, under
RCW 36.70A.040 or chapter 90.58 RCW; or

(b) Find that the state
agency, county, or city is not in procedural compliance with the
requirements of this chapter, chapter 90.58 RCW as it relates to the adoption
or amendment of shoreline master programs, or chapter 43.21C RCW as it relates
to adoption of plans, development regulations, and amendments thereto, under
RCW 36.70A.040 or chapter 90.58 RCW, in which case the board shall remand the
matter to the affected state agency, county, or city. The board shall specify
a reasonable time not in excess of one hundred eighty days, or such longer
period as determined by the board in cases of unusual scope or complexity,
within which the state agency, county, or city shall comply with the
requirements of this chapter. The board may require periodic reports to the
board on the progress the jurisdiction is making towards procedural
compliance.

(4) ((Unless the
board makes a determination of invalidity as provided in RCW 36.70A.302,)) A
finding of procedural noncompliance and an order of remand shall not
affect the validity of comprehensive plans and development regulations during
the period of remand.

(5) Any party aggrieved
by a final decision of the hearings board may appeal the decision to superior
court as provided in RCW 34.05.514 or 36.01.050 within thirty days of the final
order of the board.

Sec. 6. RCW 36.70A.320 and 1997
c 429 s 20 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) Except as provided
in subsection (((5))) (4) of this section, comprehensive plans
and development regulations, and amendments thereto, adopted under this chapter
are presumed valid upon adoption.

(2) ((Except as
otherwise provided in subsection (4) of this section,)) The burden
is on the petitioner to demonstrate that any action taken by a state agency,
county, or city under this chapter is not in procedural compliance with
the requirements of this chapter.

(3) In any petition
under this chapter, the board, after full consideration of the petition, shall
determine whether there is procedural compliance with the requirements
of this chapter. In making its determination, the board shall consider the
criteria adopted by the department under RCW 36.70A.190(4). The board shall
find procedural compliance unless it determines that the action by the
state agency, county, or city is clearly erroneous in view of the entire record
before the board and in light of the goals and requirements of this chapter.

(4) ((A county or
city subject to a determination of invalidity made under RCW 36.70A.300 or
36.70A.302 has the burden of demonstrating that the ordinance or resolution it
has enacted in response to the determination of invalidity will no longer
substantially interfere with the fulfillment of the goals of this chapter under
the standard in RCW 36.70A.302(1).

(5))) The shoreline element of a comprehensive plan
and the applicable development regulations adopted by a county or city shall
take effect as provided in chapter 90.58 RCW.

Sec. 7. RCW 36.70A.330 and 1997
c 429 s 21 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) After the time set
for complying with the requirements of this chapter under RCW 36.70A.300(3)(b)
has expired, ((or at an earlier time upon the motion of a county or city
subject to a determination of invalidity under RCW 36.70A.300,)) the board
shall set a hearing for the purpose of determining whether the state agency,
county, or city is in procedural compliance with the requirements of this
chapter.

(2) The board shall
conduct a hearing and issue a finding of procedural compliance or procedural
noncompliance with the requirements of this chapter and with any procedural
compliance schedule established by the board in its final order. A person with
standing to challenge the legislation enacted in response to the board's final
order may participate in the hearing along with the petitioner and the state
agency, county, or city. A hearing under this subsection shall be given the
highest priority of business to be conducted by the board, and a finding shall
be issued within forty-five days of the filing of the motion under subsection
(1) of this section with the board. The board shall issue any order necessary
to make adjustments to the procedural compliance schedule and set
additional hearings as provided in subsection (((5))) (4) of this
section.

(3) If the board after
a procedural compliance hearing finds that the state agency, county, or
city is not in procedural compliance, the board shall transmit its
finding to the governor. The board may recommend to the governor that the
sanctions authorized by this chapter be imposed. The board shall take into
consideration the county's or city's efforts to meet its procedural
compliance schedule in making the decision to recommend sanctions to the
governor.

(4) ((In a
compliance hearing upon petition of a party, the board shall also reconsider
its final order and decide, if no determination of invalidity has been made,
whether one now should be made under RCW 36.70A.302.

(5))) The board shall schedule additional hearings
as appropriate pursuant to subsections (1) and (2) of this section.

Sec. 8. RCW 36.70A.340 and 1991
sp.s. c 32 s 26 are each amended to read as follows:

Upon receipt from the
board of a finding that a state agency, county, or city is in procedural
noncompliance under RCW 36.70A.330, or as a result of failure to meet the
requirements of RCW 36.70A.210, the governor may either:

(1) Notify and direct
the director of the office of financial management to revise allotments in
appropriation levels;

(2) Notify and direct
the state treasurer to withhold the portion of revenues to which the county or
city is entitled under one or more of the following: The motor vehicle fuel
tax, as provided in chapter 82.36 RCW; the transportation improvement account,
as provided in RCW 47.26.084; the urban arterial trust account, as provided in
RCW 47.26.080; the rural arterial trust account, as provided in RCW 36.79.150;
the sales and use tax, as provided in chapter 82.14 RCW; the liquor profit tax,
as provided in RCW 66.08.190; and the liquor excise tax, as provided in RCW
82.08.170; or

(3) File a notice of procedural
noncompliance with the secretary of state and the county or city, which shall
temporarily rescind the county or city's authority to collect the real estate
excise tax under RCW 82.46.030 until the governor files a notice rescinding the
notice of procedural noncompliance.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
9. The following acts or
parts of acts are each repealed:

(1) RCW 36.70A.302 (Determination of
invalidity--Vesting of development permits--Interim controls) and 1997 c 429 s
16;

(2) RCW 36.70A.305 (Expedited review) and
1996 c 325 s 4; and

(3) RCW 36.70A.335 (Order of invalidity
issued before July 27, 1997) and 1997 c 429 s 22.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
10. This act applies to all
petitions for review filed with the growth management hearings boards on or
after July 1, 2002.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 11. This act takes effect
July 1, 2002.

---
END ---