BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF
WASHINGTON:

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 1. The legislature finds that
there is evidence that some state licenses and certificates are being
counterfeited. As a result, people without proper training and where required,
background checks, are obtaining employment, often with our most vulnerable
citizens. Because of the ease of counterfeiting these documents, there are
many opportunities for fraud, theft, and abuse. Therefore, the legislature
finds that in order to ensure the authenticity of these documents, there should
be an inquiry into (1) requiring that governmental licenses, certificates,
endorsements, and registrations be printed on paper that is resistant to
counterfeiting and (2) a means for verifying such authenticity in real-time by
internet or telephone.

---
END ---