BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF
WASHINGTON:

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 1. The legislature finds
that there is evidence that some state licenses and certificates are being
counterfeited. As a result, people without proper training and where required,
background checks, are obtaining employment, often with our most vulnerable
citizens. Because of the ease of counterfeiting these documents, there are
many opportunities for fraud, theft, and abuse. Therefore, the legislature
finds that in order to ensure the authenticity of these documents, there should
be an inquiry into (1) requiring that licenses, certificates, endorsements, and
registrations for health professions and health-related enterprises be printed
on paper that is resistant to counterfeiting and (2) a means for verifying such
anthenticity in real‑time by internet or telephone.

---
END ---