BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF
WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1. RCW 70.160.020 and 1985
c 236 s 2 are each amended to read as follows:

As used in this
chapter, the following terms have the meanings indicated unless the context
clearly indicates otherwise.

(1) "Lounge or
lounge area" means an area used primarily for the preparation, sale, and
service of liquor, and is licensed for that use at all times by the liquor
control board. Persons under twenty-one years of age are not permitted to
enter or remain in a lounge or lounge area, except as otherwise provided under
law.

(2)
"Smoke" or "smoking" means the carrying or smoking of any
kind of lighted pipe, cigar, cigarette, or any other lighted smoking equipment.

(((2))) (3)
"Public place" means that portion of any building or vehicle used by
and open to the public, regardless of whether the building or vehicle is owned
in whole or in part by private persons or entities, the state of Washington, or
other public entity, and regardless of whether a fee is charged for admission.

Public places include,
but are not limited to: Elevators, public conveyances or transportation
facilities, museums, concert halls, theaters, auditoriums, exhibition halls,
indoor sports arenas, hospitals, nursing homes, health care facilities or
clinics, enclosed shopping centers, retail stores, retail service
establishments, financial institutions, educational facilities, ticket areas,
public hearing facilities, state legislative chambers and immediately adjacent
hallways, public restrooms, libraries, restaurants, waiting areas, lobbies, and
reception areas. A public place does not include a private residence. This
chapter is not intended to restrict smoking in private facilities ((which))
that are occasionally open to the public except upon the occasions when
the facility is open to the public.

(((3))) (4)
"Public card room" means the area of the premises of a for-profit
retail business that has been specifically set aside or designated by the
licensee and approved by the gambling commission for the playing of cards by
members of the public as a commercial stimulant to the business in accordance
with chapter 9.46 RCW and the rules of the gambling commission.

(5)
"Restaurant" means any building, structure, or area used, maintained,
or advertised as, or held out to the public to be, an enclosure where meals are
made available to be consumed on the premises, for consideration of payment.

Sec. 2. RCW 70.160.030 and 1985
c 236 s 3 are each amended to read as follows:

No person may smoke in
a public place except in an area designated as a smoking area((s))
under RCW 70.160.040.

Sec. 3. RCW 70.160.040 and 1985 c
236 s 4 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) ((A smoking area
may be designated in a public place by the owner or, in the case of a leased or
rented space, by the lessee or other person in charge except in:

(a) Elevators;
buses, except for private hire; streetcars; taxis, except those clearly and
visibly designated by the owner to permit smoking; public areas of retail
stores and lobbies of financial institutions; office reception areas and
waiting rooms of any building owned or leased by the state of Washington or by
any city, county, or other municipality in the state of Washington; museums;
public meetings or hearings; classrooms and lecture halls of schools, colleges,
and universities; and the seating areas and aisle ways which are contiguous to seating
areas of concert halls, theaters, auditoriums, exhibition halls, and indoor
sports arenas; and

(b) Hallways of
health care facilities, with the exception of nursing homes, and lobbies of
concert halls, theaters, auditoriums, exhibition halls, and indoor sports
arenas, if the area is not physically separated. Owners or other persons in
charge are not required to incur any expense to make structural or other
physical modifications in providing these areas.

Except as provided
in other provisions of this chapter,)) No public place, other than a bar, tavern, ((bowling alley))
public card room, tobacco shop, lounge or lounge area, or ((restaurant))
private hire bus or taxi, may be designated as a smoking area ((in
its entirety)). If a bar, tavern, public card room, tobacco shop, lounge
or lounge area, or ((restaurant)) private hire bus or taxi is
designated as a smoking area ((in its entirety)), this designation shall
be posted conspicuously ((on)) at all entrances normally used by
the public.

(2) Where a
smoking area((s are)) is designated under this section in a
public place adjacent to a nonsmoking area, ((existing)) physical
barriers and ventilation systems shall be used to minimize the toxic effect of
smoke in adjacent nonsmoking areas as follows:

(a) Designated
smoking areas must be separate and fully enclosed on all sides by solid walls
or windows that extend from floor to ceiling, and have a full door between the
designated smoking area and an adjacent nonsmoking public place. The door must
remain closed when not actively in use by patrons or staff for entrance or
exit.

(b) Designated
smoking areas must be ventilated at a rate of at least sixty cubic feet per
minute per smoker (calculated on the basis of the maximum number of smokers
expected during the course of normal operations), which ventilation may be
supplied by transfer air from adjacent areas.

(c) Sufficient
negative pressure must be maintained at all times in designated smoking areas
to prevent smoke migration to adjacent nonsmoking areas.

(d) Designated
smoking areas must operate with a separate mechanical exhaust system and be
exhausted directly outside, without recirculation of air to nonsmoking areas.

(e) If the
mechanical exhaust system, negative pressure, or other barriers or ventilation
mechanisms for a designated smoking area are not operating properly, smoking
must be prohibited in the area until repairs are completed.

(3) ((Managers of
restaurants who choose to provide smoking areas shall designate an adequate
amount of seating to meet the demands of restaurant patrons who wish to smoke.
Owners of restaurants are not required to incur any expense to make structural
or other physical modifications in providing these areas. Restaurant patrons
shall be informed that separate smoking and nonsmoking sections are available.

(4) Except as
otherwise provided in this chapter, a facility or area may be designated in its
entirety as a nonsmoking area by the owner or other person in charge)) In all public places, the means of access between
the main entrance to the building and all areas within the building not
designated as smoking areas must remain a smoke-free area. A separate entrance
may be maintained for direct entry from outside the building into a designated
smoking area.

(4) Public places
must be either designated as smoking areas under this chapter at all times or
must remain smoke-free at all times.

Sec. 4. RCW 70.160.050 and 1985
c 236 s 5 are each amended to read as follows:

Owners, or in the case
of a leased or rented space the lessee or other person in charge, of a place
regulated under this chapter shall make every reasonable effort to prohibit
smoking in public places by posting signs prohibiting or permitting smoking as
appropriate under this chapter. Signs shall be posted conspicuously at each
building entrance. In the case of restaurants, bowling centers, skating
rinks, retail stores, and retail service establishments, signs shall
be posted conspicuously at each entrance and in prominent locations throughout
the place. The boundary between a nonsmoking area and a designated
smoking ((permitted)) area shall be clearly designated so that persons
may differentiate between the two areas, and must also be posted with a
notice that persons under twenty-one years of age are not permitted to enter or
remain in a designated smoking area.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
5. A new section is added
to chapter 70.160 RCW to read as follows:

This chapter may not be
interpreted or construed to permit smoking where it is otherwise restricted by
other applicable laws.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 6. For locations that
possess an occupancy permit as of January 1, 2002, this act applies beginning
January 1, 2005. For locations that do not possess an occupancy permit as of
January 1, 2002, this act applies beginning July 1, 2002.

---
END ---