BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF
WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1. RCW 90.48.465 and 1998 c
262 s 16 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) The department
shall establish annual fees to collect expenses for issuing and administering
each class of permits under RCW 90.48.160, 90.48.162, and 90.48.260. An
initial fee schedule shall be established by rule within one year of March 1,
1989, and thereafter the fee schedule shall be adjusted no more often than once
every two years. Except as specified under subsection (6) of this section,
this fee schedule shall apply to all permits, regardless of date of
issuance, and fees shall be assessed prospectively. Except as specified
under subsection (6) of this section, all fees charged shall be based on
factors relating to the complexity of permit issuance and compliance and may be
based on pollutant loading and toxicity and be designed to encourage recycling
and the reduction of the quantity of pollutants. Except as specified under
subsection (6) of this section, fees shall be established in amounts to
fully recover and not to exceed expenses incurred by the department in
processing permit applications and modifications, monitoring and evaluating
compliance with permits, conducting inspections, securing laboratory analysis
of samples taken during inspections, reviewing plans and documents directly
related to operations of permittees, overseeing performance of delegated
pretreatment programs, and supporting the overhead expenses that are directly
related to these activities.

(2) The annual fee paid
by a municipality, as defined in 33 U.S.C. Sec. 1362, for all domestic
wastewater facility permits issued under RCW 90.48.162 and 90.48.260 shall not
exceed the total of a maximum of fifteen cents per month per residence or
residential equivalent contributing to the municipality's wastewater system.
The department shall adopt by rule a schedule of credits for any municipality
engaging in a comprehensive monitoring program beyond the requirements imposed
by the department, with the credits available for five years from March 1,
1989, and with the total amount of all credits not to exceed fifty thousand
dollars in the five-year period.

(3) The department
shall ensure that indirect dischargers do not pay twice for the administrative
expense of a permit. Accordingly, administrative expenses for permits issued
by a municipality under RCW 90.48.165 are not recoverable by the department.

(4) In establishing
fees, the department shall consider the economic impact of fees on small
dischargers and the economic impact of fees on public entities required to
obtain permits for storm water runoff and shall provide appropriate
adjustments.

(5) The fee for an
individual permit issued for a dairy farm as defined under chapter 90.64 RCW
shall be fifty cents per animal unit up to one thousand one hundred sixty-seven
dollars for fiscal year 1998 and one thousand two hundred fourteen dollars for
fiscal year 1999. The fee for a general permit issued for a dairy farm as
defined under chapter 90.64 RCW shall be fifty cents per animal unit up to
eight hundred seventeen dollars for fiscal year 1998 and eight hundred fifty
dollars for fiscal year 1999. Thereafter, these fees may rise in accordance
with the fiscal growth factor as provided in chapter 43.135 RCW.

(6) If a commercial
or industrial permittee, operating under a permit issued under either RCW
90.48.160 or 90.48.260, operates for one year without violating the conditions
of the permit, that permittee qualifies for a three percent reduction in the
fees charged by the department under this chapter for each consecutive year in
which the permittee has not violated the permit conditions. The baseline for
calculating the reductions is the permit fee charged by the department in 2000,
or the latest year in which the permittee was found to have violated the
conditions of the permit. For purposes of calculating fees for 2003, the
department shall make the reductions retroactive to year 2000 for all
permittees that have not violated the conditions of their permits since 2000.
If, during the preceding year, a permittee is found to have violated the
conditions of the permit, the department shall recalculate the permit fees for
the next calendar year based on its current schedule of fees developed under
this section.

(7) All fees
collected under this section shall be deposited in the water quality permit
account hereby created in the state treasury. Moneys in the account may be
appropriated only for purposes of administering permits under RCW 90.48.160,
90.48.162, and 90.48.260.

(((7)))
(8) Beginning with the biennium ending June 30, 1997, the department
shall present a biennial progress report on the use of moneys from the account
to the legislature. The report will be due December 31st of odd-numbered
years. The report shall consist of information on fees collected, actual
expenses incurred, and anticipated expenses for the current and following
fiscal years.

--- END ---