BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF
WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1. RCW 36.89.080 and 1998 c
74 s 1 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) Any county
legislative authority may provide by resolution for revenues by fixing rates
and charges for the furnishing of service to those served or receiving benefits
or to be served or to receive benefits from any storm water control facility or
contributing to an increase of surface water runoff. In fixing rates and
charges, the county legislative authority may in its discretion consider: (((1)))
(a) Services furnished or to be furnished; (((2))) (b)
benefits received or to be received; (((3))) (c) the character
and use of land or its water runoff characteristics; (((4))) (d)
the nonprofit public benefit status, as defined in RCW 24.03.490, of the land
user; (((5))) (e) income level of persons served or provided
benefits under this chapter, including senior citizens and disabled persons; or
(((6))) (f) any other matters which present a reasonable
difference as a ground for distinction. The service charges and rates
collected shall be deposited in a special fund or funds in the county treasury
to be used only for the purpose of paying all or any part of the cost and
expense of maintaining and operating storm water control facilities, all or any
part of the cost and expense of planning, designing, establishing, acquiring,
developing, constructing and improving any of such facilities, or to pay or
secure the payment of all or any portion of any issue of general obligation or
revenue bonds issued for such purpose.

(2) Any
person who conducts a commercial or industrial operation of any kind and
operates under a valid waste disposal permit issued under chapter 90.48 RCW or
a national pollutant discharge elimination system permit is exempt from the
rates and charges authorized by this section.

--- END ---