BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF
WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec.
1. The department of natural
resources must review the laws of other western states within the United States
that preclude or limit the ability of Washington wood processors to purchase
timber from those states for processing in Washington. The department will
meet and discuss with representatives of in-state wood processors and labor to
assess the impact these laws may have on Washington mills and jobs. The
department will submit a report to the appropriate legislative committees by
December 1, 2002, that includes:

(1) Any data regarding
the number of bids that have been rejected by Washington mills by those states
because of the exclusionary laws;

(2) An estimate of the
number of mills that would bid on timber from those states;

(3) An estimate of any expansions
that might occur, or layoffs that may be prevented, for mills in Washington if
those companies could bid on the timber from those states;

(4) An estimate of the
additional tax revenues that would derive to Washington state and its counties
if mills in Washington could bid on that timber; and

(5) Any
recommendations regarding how these barriers to interstate commerce may be
removed, including the creation of interstate compacts, the adoption of
reciprocal language in Washington that applies only to those states that have
erected and maintained such barriers, and the filing of a lawsuit challenging
the constitutionality of those state barriers.

---
END ---