BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF
WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec.
1. A new section is added
to chapter 28B.15 RCW to read as follows:

(1) Beginning with the
academic year 2002-03, resident undergraduate tuition fees at institutions of
higher education shall be determined by multiplying base-year tuition by a
factor.

(2)(a)(i) The factor
for full-time resident undergraduate students at the state universities whose
household income exceeds the median family income is their indexed income
multiplied by sixty-four one-hundredths.

(ii) The factor for
full-time resident undergraduate students at the state universities whose
household income is less than the median family income is their indexed income
multiplied by thirteen and fifty-eight one-hundredths.

(b)(i) The factor for
full-time resident undergraduate students at the regional universities and The
Evergreen State College whose household income exceeds the median family income
is their indexed income multiplied by one and seven-hundredths.

(ii) The factor for
full-time resident undergraduate students at the regional universities and The
Evergreen State College whose household income is less than the median family
income is their indexed income multiplied by thirteen and fifty-eight
one-hundredths.

(c)(i) The factor for
full-time resident students at the community and technical colleges whose
household income exceeds the median family income is their indexed income
multiplied by one and two hundred nine one-thousandths.

(ii) The factor for
full-time resident students at the community and technical colleges whose
household income is less than the median family income is their indexed income
multiplied by thirteen and fifty-seven one-hundredths.

(3) The definitions in
this section apply throughout this section unless the context clearly requires
otherwise.

(a) "Base-year tuition"
is the weighted average of operating fees and building fees for each
institutional sector as assumed in the 2001 omnibus appropriations act.

(b) "Household
income" is the student's family's adjusted gross income for federal
internal revenue code purposes, calculated in a manner consistent with
financial aid requirements.

(c) "Indexed
income" is the difference in ten percent intervals above or below the
median family income.

(d) "Institutional
sector" refers to groupings of institutions of higher education. As used
in calculations, the state universities constitute one sector; the regional
universities constitute one sector; The Evergreen State College constitutes one
sector; and the community and technical colleges constitute one sector.

(e) "Median family
income" means the state median family income for a family of four as
determined by the United States department of health and human services,
adjusted for family size.

(f) "Tuition
fees" means operating fees and building fees.

Sec. 2. RCW 28B.15.066 and 2000
c 152 s 2 are each amended to read as follows:

It is the intent of the
legislature that:

In making
appropriations from the state's general fund to institutions of higher
education, each appropriation shall conform to the following:

(1) The appropriation
shall not be reduced by the amount of operating fees revenue estimated to be
collected from students enrolled at the state-funded enrollment level specified
in the omnibus biennial operating appropriations act;

(2) The appropriation
shall not be reduced by the amount of operating fees revenue collected from
students enrolled above the state-funded level, but within the over-enrollment
limitations, specified in the omnibus biennial operating appropriations act; ((and))

(3) The general fund
state appropriation shall not be reduced by the amount of operating fees
revenue collected as a result of waiving less operating fees revenue than the
amounts authorized under RCW 28B.15.910. State general fund appropriations
shall not be provided for revenue foregone as a result of or for waivers
granted under RCW 28B.15.915; and

(4) The general fund
state appropriation shall be increased or decreased to offset the increased or
decreased tuition fees received by each institution of higher education as a
result of section 1 of this act.

Sec. 3. RCW 28B.15.067 and 1997
c 403 s 1 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) Subject to
adjustment under section 1 of this act, tuition fees shall be established
under the provisions of this chapter.

(2) Academic year
tuition for full-time students at the state's institutions of higher education
for the 1997-98 academic year, other than the summer term, shall be as provided
in this subsection.

(a) At the University
of Washington and Washington State University:

(i) For resident
undergraduate students and other resident students not in graduate, law, or
first professional programs, two thousand nine hundred eighty-eight dollars;

(ii)(A) For nonresident
undergraduate students and other nonresident students at the University of
Washington not in graduate, law, or first professional programs, ten thousand
two hundred seventy-eight dollars;

(B) For nonresident
undergraduate students and other nonresident students at Washington State
University not in graduate or first professional programs, nine thousand eight
hundred seventy dollars;

(iii) For resident
graduate students, four thousand eight hundred fifty-four dollars;

(iv) For nonresident
graduate students, twelve thousand five hundred eighty-eight dollars;

(v) For resident law
students, five thousand ten dollars;

(vi) For nonresident
law students, twelve thousand nine hundred fifteen dollars;

(vii) For resident
first professional students, eight thousand one hundred twelve dollars; and

(viii) For nonresident
first professional students, twenty-one thousand twenty-four dollars.

(b) At the regional
universities and The Evergreen State College:

(i) For resident
undergraduate and all other resident students not in graduate programs, two
thousand two hundred eleven dollars;

(ii) For nonresident
undergraduate and all other nonresident students not in graduate programs,
eight thousand six hundred forty-six dollars;

(iii) For resident
graduate students, three thousand seven hundred twenty-six dollars; and

(iv) For nonresident
graduate students, eleven thousand nine hundred seventy-six dollars.

(c) At the community
colleges:

(i) For resident
students, one thousand three hundred eleven dollars; and

(ii) For nonresident
students, five thousand five hundred eighty-six dollars.

(3) Academic year
tuition for full-time students at the state's institutions of higher education
beginning with the 1998-99 academic year, other than the summer term, shall be
as provided in this subsection unless different rates are adopted in the
omnibus appropriations act.

(a) At the University
of Washington and Washington State University:

(i) For resident
undergraduate students and other resident students not in graduate, law, or
first professional programs, three thousand one hundred eight dollars;

(ii)(A) For nonresident
undergraduate students and other nonresident students at the University of
Washington not in graduate, law, or first professional programs, eleven
thousand one hundred thirty dollars;

(B) For nonresident
undergraduate students and other nonresident students at Washington State
University not in graduate or first professional programs, ten thousand two
hundred sixty-six dollars;

(iii) For resident
graduate students, five thousand forty-six dollars;

(iv) For nonresident
graduate students, thirteen thousand ninety-two dollars;

(v) For resident law
students, five thousand three hundred seventy-six dollars;

(vi) For nonresident
law students, thirteen thousand seven hundred eighty-two dollars;

(vii) For resident
first professional students, eight thousand four hundred thirty-six dollars;
and

(viii) For nonresident
first professional students, twenty-one thousand eight hundred sixty-four
dollars.

(b) At the regional
universities and The Evergreen State College:

(i) For resident
undergraduate and all other resident students not in graduate programs, two
thousand two hundred ninety-eight dollars;

(ii) For nonresident
undergraduate and all other nonresident students not in graduate programs,
eight thousand nine hundred ninety-one dollars;

(iii) For resident
graduate students, three thousand eight hundred seventy-six dollars; and

(iv) For nonresident
graduate students, twelve thousand four hundred fifty-six dollars.

(c) At the community
colleges:

(i) For resident
students, one thousand three hundred sixty-two dollars; and

(ii) For nonresident
students, five thousand eight hundred eight dollars.

(4) For the 1997-98 and
1998-99 academic years, the University of Washington shall use at least ten
percent of the revenue received from the difference between a four percent
increase in tuition fees and the actual increase charged to law students to
assist needy low and middle-income resident law students. For the 1997-98 and
1998-99 academic years, the University of Washington shall use at least ten
percent of the revenue received from the difference between a four percent
increase in tuition fees and the actual increase charged to nonresident
undergraduate students and all other nonresident students not in graduate, law,
or first professional programs to assist needy low and middle-income resident
undergraduate students and all other resident students not enrolled in
graduate, law, or first professional programs. This requirement is in addition
to the deposit requirements of the institutional aid fund under RCW 28B.15.820.

(5) The
tuition fees established under this chapter shall not apply to high school
students enrolling in participating institutions of higher education under RCW
28A.600.300 through ((28A.600.395)) 28A.600.400.

---
END ---