BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF
WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1. RCW 28B.10.569 and 1990
c 288 s 7 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) Each institution of
higher education with a commissioned police force shall report to the
Washington association of sheriffs and police chiefs or its successor agency,
on a monthly basis, crime statistics for the Washington state uniform crime
report, in the format required by the Washington association of sheriffs and
police chiefs, or its successor agency. Institutions of higher education which
do not have commissioned police forces shall report crime statistics through
appropriate local law enforcement agencies.

(2)(a) Each
institution of higher education shall publish and distribute a report which
shall be updated annually and which shall include the crime statistics as
reported under subsection (1) of this section and crime statistics for the
institution's campus community as defined by the higher education coordinating
board or the state board for community and technical colleges, as appropriate,
for the most recent three-year period. Upon request, the institution shall
provide the report to every person who submits an application for admission to
either a main or branch campus, and to each new employee at the time of
employment. In its acknowledgement of receipt of the formal application for
admission, the institution shall notify the applicant of the availability of
such information. The information also shall be provided on an annual basis to
all students and employees. Institutions with more than one campus shall
provide the required information on a campus-by-campus basis.

(b) If there is a
significant increase in crime or pattern of criminal incidents on a campus or
in a campus community, the institution of higher education shall publicize this
information through local or campus media.

(3) Each institution of
higher education shall provide to every new student and new employee, and upon
request to other interested persons, information which follows the general
categories for safety policies and procedures outlined in this section. Such
categories shall, at a minimum, include campus enrollments, campus nonstudent
work force profile, the number and duties of campus security personnel,
arrangements with state and local police, and policies on controlled
substances. Information for the most recent academic year also shall include a
description of any programs offered by an institution's student affairs or
services department, and by student government organizations regarding crime
prevention and counseling, including a directory of available services and
appropriate telephone numbers and physical locations of these services. In
addition, institutions maintaining student housing facilities shall include
information detailing security policies and programs.

Institutions with a
main campus and one or more branch campuses shall provide the information on a
campus-by-campus basis.

In the case of
community colleges, colleges shall provide such information to the main
campuses only and shall provide reasonable alternative information at any
off-campus centers and other affiliated college sites enrolling less than one
hundred students.

(4) Each institution
shall establish a task force which shall annually examine campus security and
safety issues. The task force shall review the report published and
distributed pursuant to this section in order to ensure the accuracy and
effectiveness of the report, and make any suggestions for improvement. This
task force shall include representation from the institution's administration,
faculty, staff, recognized student organization, and police or security
organization.

(5)(a) By June 30,
2004, and at least every ten years thereafter, the higher education
coordinating board shall adopt or update rules defining "campus
community" for each four-year institution of higher education. In
developing the definitions, the higher education coordinating board shall
consult with local law enforcement agencies, the Washington association of
sheriffs and police chiefs, local prosecuting attorneys, the campus security
departments of each institution of higher education, the state board for
community and technical colleges, and private institutions of higher education.

(b) By
June 30, 2004, and at least every ten years thereafter, the state board for
community and technical colleges shall adopt or update rules defining
"campus community" for each community college. In developing the
definitions, the state board for community and technical colleges shall consult
with local law enforcement agencies, the Washington association of sheriffs and
police chiefs, local prosecuting attorneys, the campus security departments of
each institution of higher education, the higher education coordinating board,
and private institutions of higher education.

--- END ---