BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF
WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec.
1. A new section is added
to chapter 84.52 RCW to read as follows:

(1) A county, city,
town, or fire protection district may impose additional property tax levies in
an amount equal to fifty cents or less per thousand dollars of the assessed
value of property in the taxing district, in each year for up to ten
consecutive years, when authorized so to do by the voters of the taxing
district in the manner set forth in Article VII, section 2 of the Constitution
of this state.

(2) Any tax imposed
under this section must be used as additional resources for criminal justice
personnel or fire protection personnel, or both, including related personnel
costs, and training for personnel, and may not be used to supplant other
sources of funding for those purposes.

(3) If a county levies
a tax under this section, no taxing district within the county may levy a tax
under this section. No other taxing district may levy a tax under this section
if another taxing district has levied a tax under this section within its
boundaries. The limitations in this subsection (3) do not apply in the
following instances:

(a) If a county levies
less than fifty cents per thousand dollars of the assessed value of property,
then any other taxing district may levy a tax under this section equal to the
difference between the rate of the levy by the county and fifty cents.

(b) If a taxing
district within a county levies this tax, and the voters of the county
subsequently approve a levying of this tax, then the amount of the taxing
district levy within the county shall be reduced, when the combined levies
exceed fifty cents.

(4) No countywide levy
proposal may be placed on the ballot without the approval of the legislative
authority of each city exceeding fifty thousand population within the county.

(5) If a county
proposes to impose tax levies under this section, no other ballot proposition
authorizing tax levies under this section by another taxing district in the
county may be placed before the voters at the same election at which the county
ballot proposition is placed.

(6) If a ballot
proposition approved under subsection (1) of this section did not impose the
maximum allowable levy amount authorized for the taxing district under this
section, any future increase up to the maximum allowable levy amount must be
specifically authorized by the voters in accordance with subsection (1) of this
section at a general or special election.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 2. This act takes effect
January 1, 2003, if the proposed amendment to Article VII, section 2 of the
state Constitution that authorizes multiyear excess property tax levies for the
purpose of improving funding for criminal justice personnel or fire protection
personnel is validly submitted to and is approved and ratified by the voters at
the next general election. If the proposed amendment is not approved and
ratified, this act is void in its entirety.

---
END ---