BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF
WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec.
1. A new section is added
to chapter 89.12 RCW to read as follows:

The
department of ecology is authorized to enter into agreements with the United
States for the allocation of ground waters that exist as a result of the
Columbia basin project. The agreements and any allocation of water pursuant to
the agreements must be consistent with authorized project purposes, federal and
state reclamation laws, including federal rate requirements, and provisions of
United States' repayment contracts pertaining to the project. The agreements
must provide that the department grant an application to beneficially use such
water only if the department determines that the application will not impair
existing water rights or project operations or harm the public interest. Use
of water allocated pursuant to the terms of the agreements must be contingent
upon issuance of licenses by the United States to approved applicants. This
section is not intended to alter or affect any ownership interest or rights in
ground waters that are not allocated pursuant to the agreements. Before
implementing any such agreements, the department, with the concurrence of the
United States, shall adopt a rule setting forth the procedures for implementing
the agreements and the priorities for processing of applications. The
department is authorized to accept funds for administrative and staff expenses
that it incurs in connection with entering into or implementing the agreements.

--- END ---