BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF
WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec.
1. This act may be known and
cited as the voluntary income lottery act.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
2. A new section is added
to chapter 67.70 RCW to read as follows:

The commission shall
conduct an additional lottery game, to be known as the "voluntary income
lottery," in addition to other games conducted under this chapter. A
person may elect to participate in this game in any month by paying to the
commission an amount not to exceed one percent of the person's monthly gross
income, to be deposited in the voluntary lottery account. Each person who makes
a payment during a month is eligible to participate in the voluntary income
lottery drawing during the following month. The commission shall structure the
prizes for this lottery so that one of each hundred players is a winner. Each
winner shall receive ten times the amount the winner paid into that month's
game.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
3. A new section is added
to chapter 67.70 RCW to read as follows:

There is hereby created
and established a separate account, to be known as the voluntary income lottery
account. The account shall be managed, maintained, and controlled by the
commission. The account shall be a separate account outside the state
treasury. No appropriation is required to permit expenditures and payment of
obligations from the account. The account is allotted under chapter 43.88
RCW. Money in the account may be used only for:

(1) Payment of prizes
to the holders of winning lottery tickets or shares for games conducted under
section 2 of this act;

(2) Purchase and
promotion of lottery games and game‑related services for games conducted
under section 2 of this act;

(3) Payment of agent
compensation for games conducted under section 2 of this act; and

(4)
Depositing amounts not otherwise obligated under this section into the state
general fund, to be used solely for the support of public education.

---
END ---