BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF
WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1. RCW 82.04.050 and 2000
2nd sp.s. c 4 s 23 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) "Sale at
retail" or "retail sale" means every sale of tangible personal
property (including articles produced, fabricated, or imprinted) to all persons
irrespective of the nature of their business and including, among others,
without limiting the scope hereof, persons who install, repair, clean, alter,
improve, construct, or decorate real or personal property of or for consumers
other than a sale to a person who presents a resale certificate under RCW
82.04.470 and who:

(a) Purchases for the
purpose of resale as tangible personal property in the regular course of
business without intervening use by such person, but a purchase for the purpose
of resale by a regional transit authority under RCW 81.112.300 is not a sale
for resale; or

(b) Installs, repairs,
cleans, alters, imprints, improves, constructs, or decorates real or personal
property of or for consumers, if such tangible personal property becomes an
ingredient or component of such real or personal property without intervening
use by such person; or

(c) Purchases for the
purpose of consuming the property purchased in producing for sale a new article
of tangible personal property or substance, of which such property becomes an
ingredient or component or is a chemical used in processing, when the primary
purpose of such chemical is to create a chemical reaction directly through
contact with an ingredient of a new article being produced for sale; or

(d) Purchases for the
purpose of consuming the property purchased in producing ferrosilicon which is
subsequently used in producing magnesium for sale, if the primary purpose of
such property is to create a chemical reaction directly through contact with an
ingredient of ferrosilicon; or

(e) Purchases for the
purpose of providing the property to consumers as part of competitive telephone
service, as defined in RCW 82.04.065. The term shall include every sale of
tangible personal property which is used or consumed or to be used or consumed
in the performance of any activity classified as a "sale at retail"
or "retail sale" even though such property is resold or utilized as
provided in (a), (b), (c), (d), or (e) of this subsection following such use.
The term also means every sale of tangible personal property to persons engaged
in any business which is taxable under RCW 82.04.280 (2) and (7) and 82.04.290.

(2) The term "sale
at retail" or "retail sale" shall include the sale of or charge
made for tangible personal property consumed and/or for labor and services
rendered in respect to the following:

(a) The installing,
repairing, cleaning, altering, imprinting, or improving of tangible personal
property of or for consumers, including charges made for the mere use of
facilities in respect thereto, but excluding charges made for the use of
coin-operated laundry facilities when such facilities are situated in an
apartment house, rooming house, or mobile home park for the exclusive use of
the tenants thereof, and also excluding sales of laundry service to nonprofit
health care facilities, and excluding services rendered in respect to live
animals, birds and insects;

(b) The constructing,
repairing, decorating, or improving of new or existing buildings or other
structures under, upon, or above real property of or for consumers, including
the installing or attaching of any article of tangible personal property
therein or thereto, whether or not such personal property becomes a part of the
realty by virtue of installation, and shall also include the sale of services
or charges made for the clearing of land and the moving of earth excepting the
mere leveling of land used in commercial farming or agriculture;

(c) The charge for
labor and services rendered in respect to constructing, repairing, or improving
any structure upon, above, or under any real property owned by an owner who
conveys the property by title, possession, or any other means to the person
performing such construction, repair, or improvement for the purpose of
performing such construction, repair, or improvement and the property is then
reconveyed by title, possession, or any other means to the original owner;

(d) The sale of or
charge made for labor and services rendered in respect to the cleaning,
fumigating, razing or moving of existing buildings or structures, but shall not
include the charge made for janitorial services; and for purposes of this
section the term "janitorial services" shall mean those cleaning and
caretaking services ordinarily performed by commercial janitor service
businesses including, but not limited to, wall and window washing, floor
cleaning and waxing, and the cleaning in place of rugs, drapes and upholstery.
The term "janitorial services" does not include painting, papering,
repairing, furnace or septic tank cleaning, snow removal or sandblasting;

(e) The sale of or
charge made for labor and services rendered in respect to automobile towing and
similar automotive transportation services, but not in respect to those
required to report and pay taxes under chapter 82.16 RCW;

(f) The sale of and
charge made for the furnishing of lodging and all other services by a hotel,
rooming house, tourist court, motel, trailer camp, and the granting of any
similar license to use real property, as distinguished from the renting or
leasing of real property, and it shall be presumed that the occupancy of real
property for a continuous period of one month or more constitutes a rental or
lease of real property and not a mere license to use or enjoy the same;

(g) The sale of or
charge made for tangible personal property, labor and services to persons
taxable under (a), (b), (c), (d), (e), and (f) of this subsection when such
sales or charges are for property, labor and services which are used or
consumed in whole or in part by such persons in the performance of any activity
defined as a "sale at retail" or "retail sale" even though
such property, labor and services may be resold after such use or consumption.
Nothing contained in this subsection shall be construed to modify subsection
(1) of this section and nothing contained in subsection (1) of this section
shall be construed to modify this subsection.

(3) The term "sale
at retail" or "retail sale" shall include the sale of or charge
made for personal, business, or professional services including amounts
designated as interest, rents, fees, admission, and other service emoluments however
designated, received by persons engaging in the following business activities:

(a) Amusement and
recreation services including but not limited to golf, pool, billiards,
skating, bowling, ski lifts and tows, day trips for sightseeing purposes, and
others, when provided to consumers;

(b) Abstract, title
insurance, and escrow services;

(c) Credit bureau
services;

(d) Automobile parking
and storage garage services;

(e) Landscape
maintenance and horticultural services but excluding (i) horticultural services
provided to farmers and (ii) pruning, trimming, repairing, removing, and
clearing of trees and brush near electric transmission or distribution lines or
equipment, if performed by or at the direction of an electric utility;

(f) Service charges
associated with tickets to professional sporting events; and

(g) The following
personal services: Physical fitness services, tanning salon services, tattoo
parlor services, steam bath services, turkish bath services, escort services,
and dating services.

(4) The term shall
also include the sale of or charge made for public relations or advertising
services related to the marketing of prescription drugs as defined in RCW
82.08.0281, including but not limited to layout, art direction, graphic design,
copywriting, mechanical preparation, or production supervision, but not
including any amounts paid for actual broadcast or print advertising;

(5) The term
shall also include the renting or leasing of tangible personal property to
consumers and the rental of equipment with an operator.

(((5))) (6)
The term shall also include the providing of telephone service, as defined in
RCW 82.04.065, to consumers.

(((6))) (7)
The term shall also include the sale of canned software other than a sale to a
person who presents a resale certificate under RCW 82.04.470, regardless of the
method of delivery to the end user, but shall not include custom software or
the customization of canned software.

(((7))) (8)
The term shall not include the sale of or charge made for labor and services
rendered in respect to the building, repairing, or improving of any street,
place, road, highway, easement, right of way, mass public transportation
terminal or parking facility, bridge, tunnel, or trestle which is owned by a
municipal corporation or political subdivision of the state or by the United
States and which is used or to be used primarily for foot or vehicular traffic
including mass transportation vehicles of any kind.

(((8))) (9)
The term shall also not include sales of chemical sprays or washes to persons for
the purpose of postharvest treatment of fruit for the prevention of scald,
fungus, mold, or decay, nor shall it include sales of feed, seed, seedlings,
fertilizer, agents for enhanced pollination including insects such as bees, and
spray materials to: (a) Persons who participate in the federal conservation
reserve program, the environmental quality incentives program, the wetlands
reserve program, and the wildlife habitat incentives program, or their
successors administered by the United States department of agriculture; (b)
farmers for the purpose of producing for sale any agricultural product; and (c)
farmers acting under cooperative habitat development or access contracts with
an organization exempt from federal income tax under 26 U.S.C. Sec. 501(c)(3)
or the Washington state department of fish and wildlife to produce or improve
wildlife habitat on land that the farmer owns or leases.

(((9))) (10)
The term shall not include the sale of or charge made for labor and services
rendered in respect to the constructing, repairing, decorating, or improving of
new or existing buildings or other structures under, upon, or above real
property of or for the United States, any instrumentality thereof, or a county
or city housing authority created pursuant to chapter 35.82 RCW, including the
installing, or attaching of any article of tangible personal property therein
or thereto, whether or not such personal property becomes a part of the realty
by virtue of installation. Nor shall the term include the sale of services or
charges made for the clearing of land and the moving of earth of or for the
United States, any instrumentality thereof, or a county or city housing
authority. Nor shall the term include the sale of services or charges made for
cleaning up for the United States, or its instrumentalities, radioactive waste
and other byproducts of weapons production and nuclear research and
development.

(((10))) (11)
Until July 1, 2003, the term shall not include the sale of or charge made for
labor and services rendered for environmental remedial action as defined in RCW
82.04.2635(2).

Sec. 2. RCW 82.04.190 and 1998 c
332 s 6 and 1998 c 308 s 2 are each reenacted and amended to read as follows:

"Consumer"
means the following:

(1) Any person who
purchases, acquires, owns, holds, or uses any article of tangible personal
property irrespective of the nature of the person's business and including,
among others, without limiting the scope hereof, persons who install, repair,
clean, alter, improve, construct, or decorate real or personal property of or
for consumers other than for the purpose (a) of resale as tangible personal
property in the regular course of business or (b) of incorporating such
property as an ingredient or component of real or personal property when
installing, repairing, cleaning, altering, imprinting, improving, constructing,
or decorating such real or personal property of or for consumers or (c) of
consuming such property in producing for sale a new article of tangible personal
property or a new substance, of which such property becomes an ingredient or
component or as a chemical used in processing, when the primary purpose of such
chemical is to create a chemical reaction directly through contact with an
ingredient of a new article being produced for sale or (d) purchases for the
purpose of consuming the property purchased in producing ferrosilicon which is
subsequently used in producing magnesium for sale, if the primary purpose of
such property is to create a chemical reaction directly through contact with an
ingredient of ferrosilicon;

(2)(a) Any person
engaged in any business activity taxable under RCW 82.04.290; (b) any person
who purchases, acquires, or uses any telephone service as defined in RCW
82.04.065, other than for resale in the regular course of business; (c) any
person who purchases, acquires, or uses any amusement and recreation service
defined in RCW 82.04.050(3)(a), other than for resale in the regular course of
business; and (d) any person who is an end user of software;

(3) Any person engaged
in the business of contracting for the building, repairing or improving of any
street, place, road, highway, easement, right of way, mass public
transportation terminal or parking facility, bridge, tunnel, or trestle which
is owned by a municipal corporation or political subdivision of the state of
Washington or by the United States and which is used or to be used primarily
for foot or vehicular traffic including mass transportation vehicles of any
kind as defined in RCW 82.04.280, in respect to tangible personal property when
such person incorporates such property as an ingredient or component of such
publicly owned street, place, road, highway, easement, right of way, mass
public transportation terminal or parking facility, bridge, tunnel, or trestle
by installing, placing or spreading the property in or upon the right of way of
such street, place, road, highway, easement, bridge, tunnel, or trestle or in
or upon the site of such mass public transportation terminal or parking
facility;

(4) Any person who is
an owner, lessee or has the right of possession to or an easement in real
property which is being constructed, repaired, decorated, improved, or
otherwise altered by a person engaged in business, excluding only (a) municipal
corporations or political subdivisions of the state in respect to labor and
services rendered to their real property which is used or held for public road
purposes, and (b) the United States, instrumentalities thereof, and county and
city housing authorities created pursuant to chapter 35.82 RCW in respect to
labor and services rendered to their real property. Nothing contained in this
or any other subsection of this definition shall be construed to modify any
other definition of "consumer";

(5) Any person who is
an owner, lessee, or has the right of possession to personal property which is
being constructed, repaired, improved, cleaned, imprinted, or otherwise altered
by a person engaged in business;

(6) Any person engaged
in the business of constructing, repairing, decorating, or improving new or
existing buildings or other structures under, upon, or above real property of
or for the United States, any instrumentality thereof, or a county or city
housing authority created pursuant to chapter 35.82 RCW, including the
installing or attaching of any article of tangible personal property therein or
thereto, whether or not such personal property becomes a part of the realty by
virtue of installation; also, any person engaged in the business of clearing
land and moving earth of or for the United States, any instrumentality thereof,
or a county or city housing authority created pursuant to chapter 35.82 RCW.
Any such person shall be a consumer within the meaning of this subsection in
respect to tangible personal property incorporated into, installed in, or
attached to such building or other structure by such person;

(7) Any person who is a
lessor of machinery and equipment, the rental of which is exempt from the tax
imposed by RCW 82.08.020 under RCW 82.08.02565, with respect to the sale of or
charge made for tangible personal property consumed in respect to repairing the
machinery and equipment, if the tangible personal property has a useful life of
less than one year. Nothing contained in this or any other subsection of this
section shall be construed to modify any other definition of
"consumer";

(8) Any person engaged
in the business of cleaning up for the United States, or its instrumentalities,
radioactive waste and other byproducts of weapons production and nuclear
research and development; ((and))

(9) Until July 1, 2003,
any person engaged in the business of conducting environmental remedial action
as defined in RCW 82.04.2635(2);

(10) Any person who
purchases, acquires, uses, or receives the benefit of any service specified in
RCW 82.04.050(4), unless the person purchases for the purpose of:

(a) Selling the service
without intervening use by the purchaser in the regular course of business; or

(b) Incorporating
the service as an integral part of a service specified in RCW 82.04.050(4) that
will be sold in the regular course of business.

Sec. 3. RCW 82.04.460 and 1985 c
7 s 154 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) Any person
rendering services taxable under RCW 82.04.290 and maintaining places of
business both within and without this state which contribute to the rendition
of such services shall, for the purpose of computing tax liability under RCW
82.04.290, apportion to this state that portion of his gross income which is
derived from services rendered within this state. Where such apportionment
cannot be accurately made by separate accounting methods, the taxpayer shall
apportion to this state that proportion of his total income which the cost of
doing business within the state bears to the total cost of doing business both
within and without the state.

(2) Notwithstanding the
provision of subsection (1) of this section, persons doing business both within
and without the state who receive gross income from service charges, as defined
in RCW 63.14.010 (relating to amounts charged for granting the right or
privilege to make deferred or installment payments) or who receive gross income
from engaging in business as financial institutions within the scope of chapter
82.14A RCW (relating to city taxes on financial institutions) shall apportion
or allocate gross income taxable under RCW 82.04.290 to this state pursuant to
rules promulgated by the department consistent with uniform rules for
apportionment or allocation developed by the states.

(3) The department
shall by rule provide a method or methods of apportioning or allocating gross
income derived from sales of telephone services taxed under this chapter or
services defined as a retail sale under RCW 82.04.050(4), if the gross
proceeds of sales subject to tax under this chapter do not fairly represent the
extent of the taxpayer's income attributable to this state. The rules shall
be, so far as feasible, consistent with the methods of apportionment contained
in this section and shall require the consideration of those facts,
circumstances, and apportionment factors as will result in an equitable and
constitutionally permissible division of the services.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
4. A new section is added
to chapter 82.08 RCW to read as follows:

(1) A seller shall
collect the retail sales tax on all sales of services defined as retail sales
under RCW 82.04.050(4) unless the buyer provides the seller with a multistate
use certificate. A buyer shall not provide a multistate use certificate if the
service relates to or affects only a location, market, property, or individual
in this state.

(2) The department
shall adopt rules providing the form and information required to be on
multistate use certificates. The department shall establish by rule evidence
by which a buyer may demonstrate that the criteria in subsection (1) of this
section apply.

(3) If a transaction
involves both a service for which tax is collectible under this section, and a
service for which tax is not collectible under this section, the charges shall
be separately identified and stated with respect to the collectible and
noncollectible portions of the transaction. Failure to separately state the
charges creates a presumption that tax is collectible upon the entire
transaction under this section.

(4) If the seller does
not collect tax under this section, the buyer shall remit any tax due with the
buyer's next regularly scheduled return.

Sec. 5. RCW 82.12.010 and 2001 c
188 s 3 are each amended to read as follows:

For the purposes of
this chapter:

(1)(a) "Value of
the article used" shall mean the consideration, whether money, credit,
rights, or other property except trade-in property of like kind, expressed in
terms of money, paid or given or contracted to be paid or given by the
purchaser to the seller for the article of tangible personal property, the use
of which is taxable under this chapter. The term includes, in addition to the
consideration paid or given or contracted to be paid or given, the amount of
any tariff or duty paid with respect to the importation of the article used.
In case the article used is acquired by lease or by gift or is extracted,
produced, or manufactured by the person using the same or is sold under
conditions wherein the purchase price does not represent the true value
thereof, the value of the article used shall be determined as nearly as
possible according to the retail selling price at place of use of similar
products of like quality and character under such rules as the department of
revenue may prescribe.

(b) In case the
articles used are acquired by bailment, the value of the use of the articles so
used shall be in an amount representing a reasonable rental for the use of the
articles so bailed, determined as nearly as possible according to the value of
such use at the places of use of similar products of like quality and character
under such rules as the department of revenue may prescribe. In case any such
articles of tangible personal property are used in respect to the construction,
repairing, decorating, or improving of, and which become or are to become an
ingredient or component of, new or existing buildings or other structures
under, upon, or above real property of or for the United States, any
instrumentality thereof, or a county or city housing authority created pursuant
to chapter 35.82 RCW, including the installing or attaching of any such
articles therein or thereto, whether or not such personal property becomes a
part of the realty by virtue of installation, then the value of the use of such
articles so used shall be determined according to the retail selling price of
such articles, or in the absence of such a selling price, as nearly as possible
according to the retail selling price at place of use of similar products of
like quality and character or, in the absence of either of these selling price
measures, such value may be determined upon a cost basis, in any event under
such rules as the department of revenue may prescribe.

(c) In the case of
articles owned by a user engaged in business outside the state which are
brought into the state for no more than one hundred eighty days in any period
of three hundred sixty-five consecutive days and which are temporarily used for
business purposes by the person in this state, the value of the article used
shall be an amount representing a reasonable rental for the use of the
articles, unless the person has paid tax under this chapter or chapter 82.08
RCW upon the full value of the article used, as defined in (a) of this
subsection.

(d) In the case of
articles manufactured or produced by the user and used in the manufacture or
production of products sold or to be sold to the department of defense of the
United States, the value of the articles used shall be determined according to
the value of the ingredients of such articles.

(e) In the case of an
article manufactured or produced for purposes of serving as a prototype for the
development of a new or improved product, the value of the article used shall
be determined by: (i) The retail selling price of such new or improved product
when first offered for sale; or (ii) the value of materials incorporated into
the prototype in cases in which the new or improved product is not offered for
sale.

(f) In the case of an
article purchased with a direct pay permit under RCW 82.32.087, the value of
the article used shall be determined by the retail selling price, as defined in
RCW 82.08.010, of such article if but for the use of the direct pay permit the
transaction would have been subject to sales tax;

(2) "Value of
the service used" means the consideration, whether money, credit, rights,
or other property, expressed in terms of money, paid or given or contracted to
be paid or given by the purchaser to the seller for the service, the use of
which is taxable under this chapter. If the service is received by gift or
under conditions wherein the purchase price does not represent the true value
of the service, the value of the service used shall be determined as nearly as
possible according to the selling price at the place of use of similar services
under rules prescribed by the department of revenue;

(3)
"Use," "used," "using," or "put to use"
shall have their ordinary meaning, and shall mean:

(a) With respect to
tangible personal property, the first act within this state by which the
taxpayer takes or assumes dominion or control over the article of tangible
personal property (as a consumer), and include installation, storage,
withdrawal from storage, or any other act preparatory to subsequent actual use
or consumption within this state; and

(b) With respect to
a service defined as a retail sale under RCW 82.04.050(4), the receipt by the
taxpayer of any part of the benefit afforded the service;

(((3))) (4)
"Taxpayer" and "purchaser" include all persons included
within the meaning of the word "buyer" and the word
"consumer" as defined in chapters 82.04 and 82.08 RCW;

(((4))) (5)
"Retailer" means every seller as defined in RCW 82.08.010 and every
person engaged in the business of selling tangible personal property or
services at retail and every person required to collect from purchasers the
tax imposed under this chapter;

(((5))) (6)
The meaning ascribed to words and phrases in chapters 82.04 and 82.08 RCW,
insofar as applicable, shall have full force and effect with respect to taxes
imposed under the provisions of this chapter. "Consumer," in
addition to the meaning ascribed to it in chapters 82.04 and 82.08 RCW insofar
as applicable, shall also mean any person who distributes or displays, or
causes to be distributed or displayed, any article of tangible personal
property, except newspapers, the primary purpose of which is to promote the
sale of products or services.

Sec. 6. RCW 82.12.020 and 1999 c
358 s 9 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) There is hereby
levied and there shall be collected from every person in this state a tax or
excise for the privilege of using within this state as a consumer: (a) Any
article of tangible personal property purchased at retail, or acquired by
lease, gift, repossession, or bailment, or extracted or produced or
manufactured by the person so using the same, or otherwise furnished to a
person engaged in any business taxable under RCW 82.04.280 (2) or (7); or (b)
any canned software, regardless of the method of delivery, but excluding canned
software that is either provided free of charge or is provided for temporary
use in viewing information, or both.

(2) This tax shall
apply to the use of every service defined as a retail sale in RCW
82.04.050(3)(((a))) and the use of every article of tangible personal
property, including property acquired at a casual or isolated sale, and
including byproducts used by the manufacturer thereof, except as hereinafter
provided, irrespective of whether the article or similar articles are
manufactured or are available for purchase within this state.

(3) Except as provided
in RCW 82.12.0252, payment by one purchaser or user of tangible personal
property or service of the tax imposed by chapter 82.08 or 82.12 RCW shall not
have the effect of exempting any other purchaser or user of the same property
or service from the taxes imposed by such chapters.

(4) The tax shall be
levied and collected in an amount equal to the value of the article used by the
taxpayer multiplied by the rate in effect for the retail sales tax under RCW
82.08.020.

Sec. 7. RCW 82.12.0252 and 1980
c 37 s 52 are each amended to read as follows:

The
provisions of this chapter shall not apply in respect to the use of any article
of tangible personal property or service defined as a retail sale
purchased at retail or acquired by lease, gift or bailment if the sale thereof
to, or the use thereof by, the present user or ((his)) the user's
bailor or donor has already been subjected to the tax under chapter 82.08 or
82.12 RCW and such tax has been paid by the present user or by his bailor or
donor; or in respect to the use of property acquired by bailment and such tax has
once been paid based on reasonable rental as determined by RCW 82.12.060
measured by the value of the article at time of first use multiplied by the tax
rate imposed by chapter 82.08 or 82.12 RCW as of the time of first use; or in
respect to the use of any article of tangible personal property acquired by
bailment, if the property was acquired by a previous bailee from the same
bailor for use in the same general activity and such original bailment was
prior to June 9, 1961.

Sec. 8. RCW 82.12.0255 and 1980
c 37 s 55 are each amended to read as follows:

The
provisions of this chapter shall not apply in respect to the use of any article
of tangible personal property or any service defined as a retail sale
which the state is prohibited from taxing under the Constitution of the state
or under the Constitution or laws of the United States.

Sec. 9. RCW 82.12.035 and 1996 c
148 s 6 are each amended to read as follows:

A credit shall be
allowed against the taxes imposed by this chapter upon the use of tangible
personal property, or services taxable under RCW 82.04.050(3)(((a))), in
the state of Washington in the amount that the present user thereof or his or
her bailor or donor has paid a retail sales or use tax with respect to such
property to any other state of the United States, any political subdivision
thereof, the District of Columbia, and any foreign country or political
subdivision thereof, prior to the use of such property in Washington.

Sec. 10. RCW 82.12.060 and 1975
1st ex.s. c 278 s 54 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) In the case
of installment sales and leases of personal property, the department, by ((regulation))
rule, may provide for the collection of taxes upon the installments of
the purchase price, or amount of rental, as of the time the same fall due.

(2) In the case
of property acquired by bailment, the department, by ((regulation)) rule,
may provide for payment of the tax due in installments based on the reasonable
rental for the property as determined under RCW 82.12.010(1).

(3) In the case of
services defined as a retail sale under RCW 82.04.050(4), the seller may
collect taxes based upon payments of the purchase price, as of the time the
payments are made, regardless of the accounting method used by the seller or
whether the sales were made under an installment agreement.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
11. A new section is added
to chapter 82.12 RCW to read as follows:

(1) The entire value of
a service used in this state is subject to tax under this chapter, unless
apportionment is allowed under this section.

(2) A taxpayer
maintaining places of business both within and without this state may apportion
the value of service used by the taxpayer. The taxable portion of the value of
the service equals the full value of the service multiplied by an apportionment
fraction, the numerator of which is the property factor plus the payroll factor
plus the sales factor, and the denominator of which is three. The taxpayer's
sales, property, and payroll factors shall be calculated as provided in RCW
82.56.010, except the department may alter the components of the apportionment
factors by rule to be consistent with uniform rules for apportionment or
allocation developed by the states for particular industries.

(3) The department
shall provide by rule for the time and manner of recalculating the
apportionment formula. The apportionment factor shall not be required to be
recalculated more often than annually.

(4) If the requirements
of this section do not fairly represent the extent of the taxpayer's use of a service
in this state, the taxpayer may petition for, or the department may require, in
respect to all or any part of the taxpayer's use of services, if reasonable:

(a) Separate
accounting;

(b) The exclusion of
any one or more of the factors;

(c) The inclusion of
one or more additional factors that will fairly represent the taxpayer's use of
services in this state; or

(d) The employment of
any other method to effectuate an equitable allocation and apportionment of the
taxpayer's use of services.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 12. This act takes effect
July 1, 2002.

---
END ---