BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF
WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec.
1. A new section is added
to chapter 28A.655 RCW to read as follows:

(1) The legislature
finds that the Washington assessments of student learning for elementary,
middle, and high school years are an important tool for students, parents,
teachers, schools, and the state. These assessments are so important that the
legislature encourages all students in the state to participate in the
assessments, which are required of public school students and voluntary for
students attending private schools and students receiving home-based
education. The assessments let students and their parents know the student's
progress in learning the skills and knowledge the state deems necessary to
become a responsible citizen and successfully live, learn, and work in the
twenty-first century.

(2) Students receiving
home-based education under chapter 28A.200 RCW may voluntarily take the
Washington assessments of student learning through the local school district at
district expense as part of the district's ancillary services. The school
district shall not regulate these students simply because they take the
assessments.

(3)(a) Individual
students attending private schools under chapter 28A.195 RCW may take the
Washington assessments of student learning through the local school district at
district expense as part of the district's ancillary services.

(b) If a
significant number of students who attend the same private school wish to take
the Washington assessments of student learning, the assessment contractor may
provide the assessments at the private school and may agree to have the private
school administer the assessments. The superintendent shall pay the assessment
contractor the cost of the test itself, including processing the test to
determine the results, for each student taking the assessments under this
subsection (3)(b). The superintendent shall not pay for any costs the private
school may incur in administering the assessments at the private school, such
as staff or school administrative costs.

--- END ---