BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF
WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec.
1. (1) The legislature
recognizes that as the state embarks on an aggressive twenty-year
transportation plan to relieve severe traffic congestion, increase freight
mobility, increase the state's ability to become more regionally competitive,
attract new businesses, and contribute to our statewide economic future, it is
necessary to ensure the availability of construction aggregates used in
transportation. The legislature further recognizes that these mineral
resources of regional significance are fundamentally necessary, vital, and
essential to the construction, maintenance, and repair of the transportation
infrastructure of Washington state.

The legislature finds
that not all mineral resources of long-term commercial significance can be used
as construction aggregates and not all regions of the state have sufficient
supplies of construction aggregates. As a result, transportation projects may
not be completed timely, economically, and with the quality of aggregates
necessary for the long-term durability of Washington's vital infrastructure and
transportation needs.

It is further
recognized that as Washington state continues to grow and more investments in
transportation and related infrastructure, manufacturing facilities, affordable
housing, and other community economic development facilities are needed,
construction aggregates will become a mineral resource of regional
significance. Therefore, the legislature declares that a comprehensive review
and study is necessary to ensure that construction grade aggregate is available
in sufficient amounts for the state's needs.

(2)(a) The review
committee on transportation construction materials is created to study the
state's need for aggregate as recognized under subsection (1) of this section.
The committee is comprised of the following:

(i) The chair of the
house of representative's task force on economic competition, who is chair of
the review committee;

(ii) The chairs and
ranking minority caucus members of the house of representatives and senate
committees on transportation;

(iii) The secretary of
transportation;

(iv) A geologist
representing the department of natural resources;

(v) A representative of
the association of general contractors;

(vi) A representative
of the governor;

(vii) A representative
of the Washington chapter of the American public works association; and

(viii) An operating
engineer representing the building and trades council.

(b) The committee
shall:

(i) Determine whether
the goals and requirements under chapter 36.70A RCW are being met with regard
to the identification, designation, and supply of aggregate necessary to meet
the twenty-year comprehensive plans and whether sufficient quality and quantity
of aggregate is available to meet the transportation elements of the department
of transportation and county, city, or municipal projects;

(ii) Determine whether
environmental review procedures allow the efficient processing of permit
applications without reducing environmental protection and without undermining
the expectation that a successful project will receive a permit in a timely
manner;

(iii) Ensure the state
has competitive and efficient industries by evaluating and identifying areas of
redundant, duplicative, and costly regulations and suggesting remedies to
eliminate those inefficient impediments;

(iv) Consider whether
the aggregate and affiliated industries should be regulated by one agency in
order to improve the permit process by providing a more complete and better
understanding of technical, operating, reclamation, usual and customary
practices, and enforcement issues; and

(v) No later than
December 15, 2002, prepare and submit to the appropriate committees of the
legislature its findings and any legislation necessary to implement the review
committee's recommendations.

(2) The office of
program research within the house of representatives shall provide technical
and staff support.

(3) For
the purposes of this section "construction aggregate" or
"aggregate" includes, but is not limited to, minerals such as sand,
gravel, stone, hard rock, or other aggregates of sufficient quality,
durability, and strength that are consistent with the specifications adopted by
the Washington state department of transportation and the American standards of
testing materials (ASTM C-33).

---
END ---