BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF
WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec.
1. LEGISLATIVE FINDINGS‑-INTENT. The legislature finds
that the events of September 11, 2001, have focused our nation's attention on
the importance of preparedness in preventing, investigating, and prosecuting
acts of terrorism against its citizens. The legislature further finds that, to
be effective, this effort requires a partnership among the federal, state, and
local governments. In furtherance of this partnership, it is the legislature's
intent to strengthen the laws of the state of Washington to better protect the
health and safety of Washington state and its residents from acts of
terrorism. It is also the intent of the legislature that this act be
interpreted to provide the greatest measure of protection and safety for the
people of this state and to preserve and protect their constitutional rights,
including the right to petition their governments and to exercise their rights
under the First Amendment to the United States Constitution.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
2. DEFINITIONS. The
definitions in this section apply throughout this chapter unless the context
clearly requires otherwise.

(1) "Biological
agent" means any microorganism, virus, infectious substance, or biological
product that may be engineered as a result of biotechnology, or any naturally
occurring microorganism, virus, infectious substance, biological product, or
toxin or vector, or any naturally occurring or bioengineered component thereof,
capable of causing:

(a) Death, disease, or
other biological malfunction in a human, an animal, a plant, or another living
organism; or

(b) Deterioration of
food, water equipment, supplies, or material of any kind; or

(c) Deleterious
alteration of the environment.

(2) "Chemical
agent" means any weapon, device, material, or substance that is designed
or intended to cause widespread death or physical injury through the release,
dissemination, or impact of toxic or poisonous chemicals or precursors of toxic
or poisonous chemicals.

(3) "Imitation
weapon of mass destruction" means any device, object, or substance that is
not a weapon of mass destruction, but which by appearance or representation
would lead a reasonable person to believe that the device or substance is a
weapon of mass destruction.

(4) "Material
support or resources" means currency or other financial securities,
financial services, lodging, training, safehouses, false documentation or
identification, intelligence information, communications equipment, facilities,
weapons, lethal substances, explosives, personnel, transportation, and other
assets.

(5) "Physical
damage" has the meaning given in RCW 9A.48.100.

(6) "Public water
system" means any publicly or privately owned system, including a system
serving only one single-family residence, providing piped water for human
consumption, including any collection, treatment, storage, or distribution
facilities.

(7) "Radioactive
material" means any material containing, emitting, or otherwise releasing
radiation or radioactivity at a level dangerous to human life.

(8) "Toxin"
means the toxic material of plants, animals, microorganisms, viruses, fungi, or
infectious substances, or a recombinant molecule, whatever its origin or method
of production, including:

(a) Any poisonous
substance or biological product that may be engineered as a result of biotechnology
produced by a living organism; or

(b) Any poisonous
isomer or biological product, homolog, or derivative of such a substance.

(9) "Vector"
means a living organism, or molecule, including a recombinant molecule, or
biological product that may be engineered as a result of biotechnology, capable
of carrying a biological agent or toxin to a host.

(10) "Weapon of
mass destruction" means any device, object, or substance that is designed,
or that a person intends to use, to cause multiple human deaths, or a
biological agent, radioactive material, or chemical agent that is possessed,
released, or disseminated without lawful authority.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
3. TERRORISM IN THE FIRST
DEGREE. (1) A person is guilty of terrorism in the first degree if such
person, with the intent to significantly disrupt the conduct of government or
of the general civilian population of the state or the United States, commits
an act which manifests an extreme indifference to human life and thereby causes
the death of another person.

(2) For the purposes of
this section, "another person," in addition to its ordinary meaning,
includes, but is not limited to, any emergency services personnel or a member
of the civilian population responding, at any point in time, to render aid in
response to the act referred to in subsection (1) of this section.

(3) Terrorism in the
first degree is a class A felony and, any other provision of law
notwithstanding, is punishable as provided in RCW 10.95.010, 10.95.030 through
10.95.900, and section 13 of this act.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
4. TERRORISM IN THE SECOND
DEGREE. (1) A person is guilty of terrorism in the second degree if such
person, with the intent to significantly disrupt the conduct of government or
of the general civilian population of the state or the United States, commits
an act which manifests an extreme indifference to human life and thereby:

(a) Causes substantial
bodily harm to any other person; or

(b) Causes substantial
damage to a habitable building or structure, whether or not occupied,
sufficient to create a substantial risk of death to another person if the
building or structure had been occupied by any such person; or

(c) Causes substantial
physical damage sufficient to disrupt the normal functioning of a critical
public or private infrastructure system including, but not limited to, a public
water system, or an emergency, governmental, medical, fire, or law enforcement
response system.

(2) Terrorism in the
second degree is a class A felony.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
5. UNLAWFUL USE OR POSSESSION
OF A WEAPON OF MASS DESTRUCTION. (1) Any person who, with the intent to
significantly disrupt the conduct of government or of the general civilian
population of the state or the United States by engaging in conduct manifesting
extreme indifference to human life, uses, manufactures, transports, possesses,
spills, disposes of, or otherwise releases a weapon of mass destruction is
guilty of unlawful use or possession of a weapon of mass destruction.

(2) Unlawful use or
possession of a weapon of mass destruction is a class A felony.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
6. THREATENING ACTS OF
TERRORISM. (1) Any person who knowingly threatens to use or release, or
falsely claims to have used or released, a weapon of mass destruction, or who
takes any other action intended to cause a reasonable belief that a weapon of
mass destruction has been or will be used or released, including, but not
limited to, placement of an imitation weapon of mass destruction in an area
open to or frequented by the public, is guilty of:

(a) Threatening acts of
terrorism in the first degree if the offense is committed with the intent to
significantly disrupt the conduct of government or of the general civilian
population of the state or the United States by threatening to engage in
conduct which manifests an extreme indifference to human life. Threatening
acts of terrorism in the first degree is a class B felony;

(b) Threatening acts of
terrorism in the second degree if the offense is committed under circumstances
not amounting to threatening acts of terrorism in the first degree.
Threatening acts of terrorism in the second degree is a class C felony.

(2) It is not a defense
to any prosecution under this section that the defendant did not have the
intention or capability of actually using or releasing a weapon of mass
destruction.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
7. PROVIDING MATERIAL
SUPPORT OR RESOURCES TO TERRORISTS. (1) Any person who knowingly provides
material support or resources or conceals or disguises the nature, location,
source, or ownership of material support or resources, intending that the
material support or resources are to be used in planning, preparing for, or
carrying out a crime defined in this chapter, or in planning, preparing for, or
carrying out the concealment or an escape from the commission of any such
offense, is guilty of providing material support or resources to terrorists.

(2) Providing material
support or resources to terrorists is a class B felony.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
8. UNLAWFUL POSSESSION OF
FALSE IDENTIFICATION FOR TERRORIST PURPOSES. (1) A person is guilty of
unlawful possession of false identification for terrorist purposes if he or
she, with the intent to commit or facilitate the commission of a crime defined
in this chapter, possesses or uses any document or record that contains false
information relating to the person who is the subject of such document or
record.

(2) Unlawful possession
of false identification for terrorist purposes is a class B felony.

Sec. 9. RCW 9A.82.010 and 2001 c
222 s 3 and 2001 c 217 s 11 are each reenacted and amended to read as follows:

Unless the context
requires the contrary, the definitions in this section apply throughout this
chapter.

(1)(a) "Beneficial
interest" means:

(i) The interest of a
person as a beneficiary under a trust established under Title 11 RCW in which
the trustee for the trust holds legal or record title to real property;

(ii) The interest of a
person as a beneficiary under any other trust arrangement under which a trustee
holds legal or record title to real property for the benefit of the
beneficiary; or

(iii) The interest of a
person under any other form of express fiduciary arrangement under which one
person holds legal or record title to real property for the benefit of the
other person.

(b) "Beneficial
interest" does not include the interest of a stockholder in a corporation
or the interest of a partner in a general partnership or limited partnership.

(c) A beneficial
interest is considered to be located where the real property owned by the
trustee is located.

(2) "Control"
means the possession of a sufficient interest to permit substantial direction
over the affairs of an enterprise.

(3)
"Creditor" means a person making an extension of credit or a person
claiming by, under, or through a person making an extension of credit.

(4) "Criminal
profiteering" means any act, including any anticipatory or completed
offense, committed for financial gain, or any offense, including any
anticipatory or completed offense, which is defined in chapter 9A.‑- RCW
(sections 1 through 8 and 19 through 25 of this act), whether or not committed
for financial gain, that is chargeable or indictable under the laws of the
state in which the act occurred and, if the act occurred in a state other than
this state, would be chargeable or indictable under the laws of this state had
the act occurred in this state and punishable as a felony and by imprisonment
for more than one year, regardless of whether the act is charged or indicted,
as any of the following:

(a) Murder, as defined
in RCW 9A.32.030 and 9A.32.050;

(b) Robbery, as defined
in RCW 9A.56.200 and 9A.56.210;

(c) Kidnapping, as
defined in RCW 9A.40.020 and 9A.40.030;

(d) Forgery, as defined
in RCW 9A.60.020 and 9A.60.030;

(e) Theft, as defined
in RCW 9A.56.030, 9A.56.040, 9A.56.060, and 9A.56.080;

(f) Unlawful sale of
subscription television services, as defined in RCW 9A.56.230;

(g) Theft of
telecommunication services or unlawful manufacture of a telecommunication
device, as defined in RCW 9A.56.262 and 9A.56.264;

(h) Child selling or
child buying, as defined in RCW 9A.64.030;

(i) Bribery, as defined
in RCW 9A.68.010, 9A.68.020, 9A.68.040, and 9A.68.050;

(j) Gambling, as
defined in RCW 9.46.220 and 9.46.215 and 9.46.217;

(k) Extortion, as
defined in RCW 9A.56.120 and 9A.56.130;

(l) Extortionate
extension of credit, as defined in RCW 9A.82.020;

(m) Advancing money for
use in an extortionate extension of credit, as defined in RCW 9A.82.030;

(n) Collection of an
extortionate extension of credit, as defined in RCW 9A.82.040;

(o) Collection of an
unlawful debt, as defined in RCW 9A.82.045;

(p) Delivery or
manufacture of controlled substances or possession with intent to deliver or
manufacture controlled substances under chapter 69.50 RCW;

(q) Trafficking in
stolen property, as defined in RCW 9A.82.050;

(r) Leading organized
crime, as defined in RCW 9A.82.060;

(s) Money laundering,
as defined in RCW 9A.83.020;

(t) Obstructing
criminal investigations or prosecutions in violation of RCW 9A.72.090,
9A.72.100, 9A.72.110, 9A.72.120, 9A.72.130, 9A.76.070, or 9A.76.180;

(u) Fraud in the
purchase or sale of securities, as defined in RCW 21.20.010;

(v) Promoting
pornography, as defined in RCW 9.68.140;

(w) Sexual exploitation
of children, as defined in RCW 9.68A.040, 9.68A.050, and 9.68A.060;

(x) Promoting
prostitution, as defined in RCW 9A.88.070 and 9A.88.080;

(y) Arson, as defined
in RCW 9A.48.020 and 9A.48.030;

(z) Assault, as defined
in RCW 9A.36.011 and 9A.36.021;

(aa) Assault of a
child, as defined in RCW 9A.36.120 and 9A.36.130;

(bb) A pattern of
equity skimming, as defined in RCW 61.34.020;

(cc) Commercial
telephone solicitation in violation of RCW 19.158.040(1);

(dd) Trafficking in
insurance claims, as defined in RCW 48.30A.015;

(ee) Unlawful practice
of law, as defined in RCW 2.48.180;

(ff) Commercial bribery,
as defined in RCW 9A.68.060;

(gg) Health care false
claims, as defined in RCW 48.80.030;

(hh) Unlicensed
practice of a profession or business, as defined in RCW 18.130.190(7);

(ii) Improperly
obtaining financial information, as defined in RCW 9.35.010; ((or))

(jj) Identity theft, as
defined in RCW 9.35.020;

(kk) Terrorism in
the first degree, as defined in section 3 of this act;

(ll) Terrorism in
the second degree, as defined in section 4 of this act;

(mm) Unlawful use or
possession of a weapon of mass destruction, as defined in section 5 of this
act;

(nn) Threatening
acts of terrorism in the first degree, as defined in section 6(1)(a) of this
act;

(oo) Threatening
acts of terrorism in the second degree, as defined in section 6(1)(b) of this
act;

(pp) Providing
material support or resources to terrorists, as defined in section 7 of this
act; or

(qq) Unlawful
possession of false identification for terrorist purposes, as defined in
section 8 of this act.

(5) "Dealer in
property" means a person who buys and sells property as a business.

(6) "Debtor"
means a person to whom an extension of credit is made or a person who
guarantees the repayment of an extension of credit or in any manner undertakes
to indemnify the creditor against loss resulting from the failure of a person
to whom an extension is made to repay the same.

(7) "Documentary
material" means any book, paper, document, writing, drawing, graph, chart,
photograph, phonograph record, magnetic tape, computer printout, other data
compilation from which information can be obtained or from which information
can be translated into usable form, or other tangible item.

(8)
"Enterprise" includes any individual, sole proprietorship,
partnership, corporation, business trust, or other profit or nonprofit legal
entity, and includes any union, association, or group of individuals associated
in fact although not a legal entity, and both illicit and licit enterprises and
governmental and nongovernmental entities.

(9) "Extortionate
extension of credit" means an extension of credit with respect to which it
is the understanding of the creditor and the debtor at the time the extension
is made that delay in making repayment or failure to make repayment could result
in the use of violence or other criminal means to cause harm to the person,
reputation, or property of any person.

(10) "Extortionate
means" means the use, or an express or implicit threat of use, of violence
or other criminal means to cause harm to the person, reputation, or property of
any person.

(11) "Financial
institution" means any bank, trust company, savings and loan association,
savings bank, mutual savings bank, credit union, or loan company under the
jurisdiction of the state or an agency of the United States.

(12) "Pattern of
criminal profiteering activity" means engaging in at least three acts of
criminal profiteering, one of which occurred after July 1, 1985, and the last
of which occurred within five years, excluding any period of imprisonment, after
the commission of the earliest act of criminal profiteering. In order to
constitute a pattern, the three acts must have the same or similar intent,
results, accomplices, principals, victims, or methods of commission, or be
otherwise interrelated by distinguishing characteristics including a nexus to
the same enterprise, and must not be isolated events. However, in any civil
proceedings brought pursuant to RCW 9A.82.100 by any person other than the
attorney general or county prosecuting attorney in which one or more acts of
fraud in the purchase or sale of securities are asserted as acts of criminal
profiteering activity, it is a condition to civil liability under RCW 9A.82.100
that the defendant has been convicted in a criminal proceeding of fraud in the
purchase or sale of securities under RCW 21.20.400 or under the laws of another
state or of the United States requiring the same elements of proof, but such
conviction need not relate to any act or acts asserted as acts of criminal
profiteering activity in such civil action under RCW 9A.82.100.

(13) "Real
property" means any real property or interest in real property, including
but not limited to a land sale contract, lease, or mortgage of real property.

(14)
"Records" means any book, paper, writing, record, computer program,
or other material.

(15) "Repayment of
an extension of credit" means the repayment, satisfaction, or discharge in
whole or in part of a debt or claim, acknowledged or disputed, valid or
invalid, resulting from or in connection with that extension of credit.

(16) "Stolen
property" means property that has been obtained by theft, robbery, or
extortion.

(17) "To collect
an extension of credit" means to induce in any way a person to make
repayment thereof.

(18) "To extend
credit" means to make or renew a loan or to enter into an agreement, tacit
or express, whereby the repayment or satisfaction of a debt or claim, whether
acknowledged or disputed, valid or invalid, and however arising, may or shall
be deferred.

(19)
"Traffic" means to sell, transfer, distribute, dispense, or otherwise
dispose of stolen property to another person, or to buy, receive, possess, or
obtain control of stolen property, with intent to sell, transfer, distribute,
dispense, or otherwise dispose of the property to another person.

(20)(a)
"Trustee" means:

(i) A person acting as
a trustee under a trust established under Title 11 RCW in which the trustee
holds legal or record title to real property;

(ii) A person who holds
legal or record title to real property in which another person has a beneficial
interest; or

(iii) A successor
trustee to a person who is a trustee under (a)(i) or (ii) of this subsection.

(b) "Trustee"
does not mean a person appointed or acting as:

(i) A personal
representative under Title 11 RCW;

(ii) A trustee of any
testamentary trust;

(iii) A trustee of any
indenture of trust under which a bond is issued; or

(iv) A trustee under a
deed of trust.

(21) "Unlawful
debt" means any money or other thing of value constituting principal or
interest of a debt that is legally unenforceable in the state in full or in
part because the debt was incurred or contracted:

(a) In violation of any
one of the following:

(i) Chapter 67.16 RCW
relating to horse racing;

(ii) Chapter 9.46 RCW
relating to gambling;

(b) In a gambling
activity in violation of federal law; or

(c) In connection with
the business of lending money or a thing of value at a rate that is at least
twice the permitted rate under the applicable state or federal law relating to
usury.

Sec. 10. RCW 9A.82.090 and 2001 c
222 s 13 are each amended to read as follows:

During the pendency of
any criminal case charging a violation of RCW 9A.82.060 or ((a violation of
RCW)) 9A.82.080, or of an offense defined in chapter 9A.‑- RCW
(sections 1 through 8 and 19 through 25 of this act) whether or not committed
for financial gain, the superior court may, in addition to its other
powers, issue an order pursuant to RCW 9A.82.100 (2) or (3). Upon conviction
of a person for a violation of RCW 9A.82.060 or ((a violation of RCW))
9A.82.080, or of an offense defined in chapter 9A.‑- RCW (sections 1
through 8 and 19 through 25 of this act) whether or not committed for financial
gain, the superior court may, in addition to its other powers of
disposition, issue an order pursuant to RCW 9A.82.100.

Sec. 11. RCW 9A.82.100 and 2001 c
222 s 14 are each amended to read as follows:

(1)(a) A person who
sustains injury to his or her person, business, or property by an act of
criminal profiteering that is part of a pattern of criminal profiteering
activity, or by an offense defined in chapter 9A.‑- RCW (sections 1
through 8 and 19 through 25 of this act) whether or not committed for financial
gain, or by a violation of RCW 9A.82.060 or 9A.82.080 may file an action in
superior court for the recovery of damages and the costs of the suit, including
reasonable investigative and attorney's fees.

(b) The attorney
general or county prosecuting attorney may file an action: (i) On behalf of
those persons injured or, respectively, on behalf of the state or county if the
entity has sustained damages, or (ii) to prevent, restrain, or remedy a pattern
of criminal profiteering activity, or an offense defined in chapter 9A.‑-
RCW (sections 1 through 8 and 19 through 25 of this act) whether or not
committed for financial gain, or a violation of RCW 9A.82.060 or 9A.82.080.

(c) An action for
damages filed by or on behalf of an injured person, the state, or the county
shall be for the recovery of damages and the costs of the suit, including
reasonable investigative and attorney's fees.

(d) In an action filed
to prevent, restrain, or remedy a pattern of criminal profiteering activity,
or an offense defined in chapter 9A.‑- RCW (sections 1 through 8 and 19
through 25 of this act) whether or not committed for financial gain, or a
violation of RCW 9A.82.060 or 9A.82.080, the court, upon proof of the
violation, may impose a civil penalty not exceeding two hundred fifty thousand
dollars, in addition to awarding the cost of the suit, including reasonable
investigative and attorney's fees.

(2) The superior court
has jurisdiction to prevent, restrain, and remedy a pattern of criminal
profiteering, or an offense defined in chapter 9A.‑- RCW (sections 1
through 8 and 19 through 25 of this act) whether or not committed for financial
gain, or a violation of RCW 9A.82.060 or 9A.82.080 after making provision
for the rights of all innocent persons affected by the violation and after
hearing or trial, as appropriate, by issuing appropriate orders.

(3) Prior to a
determination of liability, orders issued under subsection (2) of this section
may include, but are not limited to, entering restraining orders or
prohibitions or taking such other actions, including the acceptance of
satisfactory performance bonds, in connection with any property or other
interest subject to damages, forfeiture, or other restraints pursuant to this
section as the court deems proper. The orders may also include attachment,
receivership, or injunctive relief in regard to personal or real property
pursuant to Title 7 RCW. In shaping the reach or scope of receivership,
attachment, or injunctive relief, the superior court shall provide for the
protection of bona fide interests in property, including community property, of
persons who were not involved in the violation of this chapter, except to the
extent that such interests or property were acquired or used in such a way as
to be subject to forfeiture under RCW 9A.82.100(4)(f).

(4) Following a
determination of liability, orders may include, but are not limited to:

(a) Ordering any person
to divest himself or herself of any interest, direct or indirect, in any
enterprise.

(b) Imposing reasonable
restrictions on the future activities or investments of any person, including
prohibiting any person from engaging in the same type of endeavor as the
enterprise engaged in, the activities of which affect the laws of this state,
to the extent the Constitutions of the United States and this state permit.

(c) Ordering
dissolution or reorganization of any enterprise.

(d) Ordering the
payment of actual damages sustained to those persons injured by a violation of
RCW 9A.82.060 or 9A.82.080, or an offense defined in chapter 9A.‑- RCW
(sections 1 through 8 and 19 through 25 of this act) whether or not committed
for financial gain, or an act of criminal profiteering that is part of a
pattern of criminal profiteering, and in the court's discretion, increasing the
payment to an amount not exceeding three times the actual damages sustained.

(e) Ordering the
payment of all costs and expenses of the prosecution and investigation of a
pattern of criminal profiteering activity, or an offense defined in chapter
9A.‑- RCW (sections 1 through 8 and 19 through 25 of this act) whether or
not committed for financial gain, or a violation of RCW 9A.82.060 or
9A.82.080, civil and criminal, incurred by the state or county, including any
costs of defense provided at public expense, as appropriate to the state
general fund or the antiprofiteering revolving fund of the county.

(f) Ordering forfeiture
first as restitution to any person damaged by an act of criminal profiteering
that is part of a pattern of criminal profiteering, or by an offense defined
in chapter 9A.‑- RCW (sections 1 through 8 and 19 through 25 of this act)
whether or not committed for financial gain, then to the state general fund
or antiprofiteering revolving fund of the county, as appropriate, to the extent
not already ordered to be paid in other damages, of the following:

(i) Any property or
other interest acquired or maintained in violation of RCW 9A.82.060 or
9A.82.080 to the extent of the investment of funds, and any appreciation or
income attributable to the investment, from a violation of RCW 9A.82.060 or
9A.82.080.

(ii) Any property,
contractual right, or claim against property used to influence any enterprise
that a person has established, operated, controlled, conducted, or participated
in the conduct of, in violation of RCW 9A.82.060 or 9A.82.080.

(iii) All proceeds
traceable to or derived from an offense included in the pattern of criminal
profiteering activity, or an offense defined in chapter 9A.‑- RCW
(sections 1 through 8 and 19 through 25 of this act) whether or not committed
for financial gain, and all moneys, negotiable instruments, securities, and
other things of value significantly used or intended to be used significantly
to facilitate commission of the offense.

(g) Ordering payment to
the state general fund or antiprofiteering revolving fund of the county, as
appropriate, of an amount equal to the gain a person has acquired or maintained
through an offense included in the definition of criminal profiteering.

(5) In addition to or
in lieu of an action under this section, the attorney general or county
prosecuting attorney may file an action for forfeiture to the state general
fund or antiprofiteering revolving fund of the county, as appropriate, to the
extent not already ordered paid pursuant to this section, of the following:

(a) Any interest
acquired or maintained by a person in violation of RCW 9A.82.060 or 9A.82.080
to the extent of the investment of funds obtained from a violation of RCW
9A.82.060 or 9A.82.080 and any appreciation or income attributable to the
investment.

(b) Any property,
contractual right, or claim against property used to influence any enterprise
that a person has established, operated, controlled, conducted, or participated
in the conduct of, in violation of RCW 9A.82.060 or 9A.82.080.

(c) All proceeds
traceable to or derived from an offense included in the pattern of criminal
profiteering activity, or an offense defined in chapter 9A.‑- RCW
(sections 1 through 8 and 19 through 25 of this act) whether or not committed
for financial gain, and all moneys, negotiable instruments, securities, and
other things of value significantly used or intended to be used significantly
to facilitate the commission of the offense.

(6) A defendant
convicted in any criminal proceeding is precluded in any civil proceeding from
denying the essential allegations of the criminal offense proven in the
criminal trial in which the defendant was convicted. For the purposes of this
subsection, a conviction shall be deemed to have occurred upon a verdict,
finding, or plea of guilty, notwithstanding the fact that appellate review of
the conviction and sentence has been or may be sought. If a subsequent
reversal of the conviction occurs, any judgment that was based upon that conviction
may be reopened upon motion of the defendant.

(7) The initiation of
civil proceedings under this section shall be commenced within three years
after discovery of the pattern of criminal profiteering activity or after the
pattern should reasonably have been discovered or, in the case of an offense
which is defined in chapter 9A.‑- RCW (sections 1 through 8 and 19
through 25 of this act), within three years after the final disposition of any
criminal charges relating to the offense, whichever is later.

(8) The attorney
general or county prosecuting attorney may, in a civil action brought pursuant
to this section, file with the clerk of the superior court a certificate
stating that the case is of special public importance. A copy of that
certificate shall be furnished immediately by the clerk to the presiding chief
judge of the superior court in which the action is pending and, upon receipt of
the copy, the judge shall immediately designate a judge to hear and determine
the action. The judge so designated shall promptly assign the action for
hearing, participate in the hearings and determination, and cause the action to
be expedited.

(9) The standard of
proof in actions brought pursuant to this section is the preponderance of the
evidence test.

(10) A person other
than the attorney general or county prosecuting attorney who files an action
under this section shall serve notice and one copy of the pleading on the
attorney general within thirty days after the action is filed with the superior
court. The notice shall identify the action, the person, and the person's
attorney. Service of the notice does not limit or otherwise affect the right
of the state to maintain an action under this section or intervene in a pending
action nor does it authorize the person to name the state or the attorney
general as a party to the action.

(11) Except in cases
filed by a county prosecuting attorney, the attorney general may, upon timely
application, intervene in any civil action or proceeding brought under this
section if the attorney general certifies that in the attorney general's
opinion the action is of special public importance. Upon intervention, the
attorney general may assert any available claim and is entitled to the same
relief as if the attorney general had instituted a separate action.

(12) In addition to the
attorney general's right to intervene as a party in any action under this
section, the attorney general may appear as amicus curiae in any proceeding in
which a claim under this section has been asserted or in which a court is
interpreting RCW 9A.82.010, 9A.82.080, 9A.82.090, 9A.82.110, or 9A.82.120, or
this section.

(13) A private civil
action under this section does not limit any other civil or criminal action
under this chapter or any other provision. Private civil remedies provided
under this section are supplemental and not mutually exclusive.

(14) Upon motion by the
defendant, the court may authorize the sale or transfer of assets subject to an
order or lien authorized by this chapter for the purpose of paying actual
attorney's fees and costs of defense. The motion shall specify the assets for
which sale or transfer is sought and shall be accompanied by the defendant's
sworn statement that the defendant has no other assets available for such purposes.
No order authorizing such sale or transfer may be entered unless the court
finds that the assets involved are not subject to possible forfeiture under RCW
9A.82.100(4)(f). Prior to disposition of the motion, the court shall notify
the state of the assets sought to be sold or transferred and shall hear
argument on the issue of whether the assets are subject to forfeiture under RCW
9A.82.100(4)(f). Such a motion may be made from time to time and shall be
heard by the court on an expedited basis.

(15) In an action
brought under subsection (1)(a) and (b)(i) of this section, either party has
the right to a jury trial.

Sec. 12. RCW 9A.82.120 and 2001 c
222 s 16 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) The state, upon
filing a criminal action under RCW 9A.82.060 or 9A.82.080 or for an offense
defined in chapter 9A.‑- RCW (sections 1 through 8 and 19 through 25 of
this act) whether or not committed for financial gain, or a civil action
under RCW 9A.82.100, may file in accordance with this section a criminal
profiteering lien. A filing fee or other charge is not required for filing a
criminal profiteering lien.

(2) A criminal
profiteering lien shall be signed by the attorney general or the county
prosecuting attorney representing the state in the action and shall set forth
the following information:

(a) The name of the
defendant whose property or other interests are to be subject to the lien;

(b) In the discretion
of the attorney general or county prosecuting attorney filing the lien, any
aliases or fictitious names of the defendant named in the lien;

(c) If known to the
attorney general or county prosecuting attorney filing the lien, the present
residence or principal place of business of the person named in the lien;

(d) A reference to the
proceeding pursuant to which the lien is filed, including the name of the
court, the title of the action, and the court's file number for the proceeding;

(e) The name and
address of the attorney representing the state in the proceeding pursuant to
which the lien is filed;

(f) A statement that
the notice is being filed pursuant to this section;

(g) The amount that the
state claims in the action or, with respect to property or other interests that
the state has requested forfeiture to the state or county, a description of the
property or interests sought to be paid or forfeited;

(h) If known to the
attorney general or county prosecuting attorney filing the lien, a description
of property that is subject to forfeiture to the state or property in which the
defendant has an interest that is available to satisfy a judgment entered in
favor of the state; and

(i) Such other
information as the attorney general or county prosecuting attorney filing the
lien deems appropriate.

(3) The attorney
general or the county prosecuting attorney filing the lien may amend a lien
filed under this section at any time by filing an amended criminal profiteering
lien in accordance with this section that identifies the prior lien amended.

(4) The attorney
general or the county prosecuting attorney filing the lien shall, as soon as
practical after filing a criminal profiteering lien, furnish to any person
named in the lien a notice of the filing of the lien. Failure to furnish
notice under this subsection does not invalidate or otherwise affect a criminal
profiteering lien filed in accordance with this section.

(5)(a) A criminal
profiteering lien is perfected against interests in personal property in the
same manner as a security interest in like property pursuant to RCW 62A.9-302,
62A.9-303, 62A.9-304, 62A.9-305, and 62A.9-306 or as otherwise required to
perfect a security interest in like property under applicable law. In the case
of perfection by filing, the state shall file, in lieu of a financing statement
in the form prescribed by RCW 62A.9-402, a notice of lien in substantially the
following form:

NOTICE
OF LIEN

Pursuant to RCW
9A.82.120, the state of Washington claims a criminal profiteering lien on all
real and personal property of:

Name:

. . . . . . . . . . .

Address:

. . . . . . . . . . .

. . . . . . . . . . .

State
of Washington

...................................

By
(authorized signature)

On receipt of such a
notice from the state, a filing officer shall, without payment of filing fee,
file and index the notice as if it were a financing statement naming the state
as secured party and the defendant as debtor.

(b) A criminal
profiteering lien is perfected against interests in real property by filing the
lien in the office where a mortgage on the real estate would be filed or
recorded. The filing officer shall file and index the criminal profiteering
lien, without payment of a filing fee, in the same manner as a mortgage.

(6) The filing of a
criminal profiteering lien in accordance with this section creates a lien in
favor of the state in:

(a) Any interest of the
defendant, in real property situated in the county in which the lien is filed, then
maintained, or thereafter acquired in the name of the defendant identified in
the lien;

(b) Any interest of the
defendant, in personal property situated in this state, then maintained or
thereafter acquired in the name of the defendant identified in the lien; and

(c) Any property
identified in the lien to the extent of the defendant's interest therein.

(7) The lien created in
favor of the state in accordance with this section, when filed or otherwise
perfected as provided in subsection (5) of this section, has, with respect to
any of the property described in subsection (6) of this section, the same
priority determined pursuant to the laws of this state as a mortgage or
security interest given for value (but not a purchase money security interest) and
perfected in the same manner with respect to such property; except that any
lien perfected pursuant to Title 60 RCW by any person who, in the ordinary
course of his business, furnishes labor, services, or materials, or rents,
leases, or otherwise supplies equipment, without knowledge of the criminal
profiteering lien, is superior to the criminal profiteering lien.

(8) Upon entry of
judgment in favor of the state, the state may proceed to execute thereon as in
the case of any other judgment, except that in order to preserve the state's
lien priority as provided in this section the state shall, in addition to such
other notice as is required by law, give at least thirty days' notice of the
execution to any person possessing at the time the notice is given, an interest
recorded subsequent to the date the state's lien was perfected.

(9) Upon the entry of a
final judgment in favor of the state providing for forfeiture of property to
the state, the title of the state to the property:

(a) In the case of real
property or a beneficial interest in real property, relates back to the date of
filing the criminal profiteering lien or, if no criminal profiteering lien is
filed, then to the date of recording of the final judgment or the abstract
thereof; or

(b) In the case of
personal property or a beneficial interest in personal property, relates back
to the date the personal property was seized by the state, or the date of
filing of a criminal profiteering lien in accordance with this section,
whichever is earlier, but if the property was not seized and no criminal
profiteering lien was filed then to the date the final judgment was filed with
the department of licensing and, if the personal property is an aircraft, with
the federal aviation administration.

(10) This section does
not limit the right of the state to obtain any order or injunction,
receivership, writ, attachment, garnishment, or other remedy authorized under
RCW 9A.82.100 or appropriate to protect the interests of the state or available
under other applicable law.

(11) In a civil or
criminal action under this chapter, the superior court shall provide for the
protection of bona fide interests in property, including community property,
subject to liens of persons who were not involved in the violation of this
chapter, except to the extent that such interests or property were acquired or
used in such a way as to be subject to forfeiture pursuant to RCW
9A.82.100(4)(f).

NEW SECTION. Sec.
13. A new section is added
to chapter 10.95 RCW to read as follows:

AGGRAVATED FIRST DEGREE
MURDER‑-DEFINITION‑-ALTERNATIVE MEANS OF COMMISSION‑-TERRORISM
IN THE FIRST DEGREE. A person is guilty of aggravated murder in the first degree if he or
she commits terrorism in the first degree as defined by section 3 of this act
and shall be punished in accordance with the provisions of this chapter.

Sec. 14. RCW 10.95.040 and 1981 c
138 s 4 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) If a person is
charged with aggravated first degree murder as defined by RCW 10.95.020 or
section 13 of this act, the prosecuting attorney shall file written notice
of a special sentencing proceeding to determine whether or not the death
penalty should be imposed when there is reason to believe that there are not
sufficient mitigating circumstances to merit leniency.

(2) The notice of
special sentencing proceeding shall be filed and served on the defendant or the
defendant's attorney within thirty days after the defendant's arraignment upon
the charge of aggravated first degree murder unless the court, for good cause
shown, extends or reopens the period for filing and service of the notice.
Except with the consent of the prosecuting attorney, during the period in which
the prosecuting attorney may file the notice of special sentencing proceeding,
the defendant may not tender a plea of guilty to the charge of aggravated first
degree murder nor may the court accept a plea of guilty to the charge of
aggravated first degree murder or any lesser included offense.

(3) If a notice of
special sentencing proceeding is not filed and served as provided in this
section, the prosecuting attorney may not request the death penalty.

Sec. 15. RCW 9.94A.515 and 2001
2nd sp.s. c 12 s 361, 2001 c 300 s 4, 2001 c 217 s 12, and 2001 c 17 s 1 are
each reenacted and amended to read as follows:

TABLE
2

CRIMES
INCLUDED WITHIN EACH SERIOUSNESS LEVEL

XVIAggravated
Murder 1 (RCW 10.95.020)

Terrorism
1 (RCW 9A.‑-.-‑- (section 3 of this act))

XVHomicide
by abuse (RCW 9A.32.055)

Malicious
explosion 1 (RCW 70.74.280(1))

Murder
1 (RCW 9A.32.030)

Terrorism
2 (RCW 9A.‑-.-‑- (section 4 of this act))

XIVMurder
2 (RCW 9A.32.050)

Unlawful
Use or Possession of a Weapon of Mass Destruction (RCW 9A.‑-.-‑-
(section 5 of this act))

XIIIMalicious
explosion 2 (RCW 70.74.280(2))

Malicious
placement of an explosive 1 (RCW 70.74.270(1))

XIIAssault
1 (RCW 9A.36.011)

Assault
of a Child 1 (RCW 9A.36.120)

Malicious
placement of an imitation device 1 (RCW 70.74.272(1)(a))

Rape
1 (RCW 9A.44.040)

Rape
of a Child 1 (RCW 9A.44.073)

Threatening
Acts of Terrorism 1

(RCW 9A.‑-.-‑-
(section 6(1)(a) of this act))

XIManslaughter
1 (RCW 9A.32.060)

Rape
2 (RCW 9A.44.050)

Rape
of a Child 2 (RCW 9A.44.076)

XChild
Molestation 1 (RCW 9A.44.083)

Indecent
Liberties (with forcible compulsion) (RCW 9A.44.100(1)(a))

Kidnapping
1 (RCW 9A.40.020)

Leading
Organized Crime (RCW 9A.82.060(1)(a))

Malicious
explosion 3 (RCW 70.74.280(3))

Manufacture
of methamphetamine (RCW 69.50.401(a)(1)(ii))

Over
18 and deliver heroin, methamphetamine, a narcotic from Schedule I or II, or
flunitrazepam from Schedule IV to someone under 18 (RCW 69.50.406)

Providing
Material Support or Resources to Terrorists (RCW 9A.‑-.-‑- (section
7 of this act))

Sexually
Violent Predator Escape (RCW 9A.76.115)

Unlawful
Possession of False Identification for Terrorist Purposes (RCW 9A.‑-.-‑-
(section 8 of this act))

IXAssault
of a Child 2 (RCW 9A.36.130)

Controlled
Substance Homicide (RCW 69.50.415)

Explosive
devices prohibited (RCW 70.74.180)

Hit
and Run‑-Death (RCW 46.52.020(4)(a))

Homicide
by Watercraft, by being under the influence of intoxicating liquor or any drug
(RCW 79A.60.050)

Inciting
Criminal Profiteering (RCW 9A.82.060(1)(b))

Malicious
placement of an explosive 2 (RCW 70.74.270(2))

Over
18 and deliver narcotic from Schedule III, IV, or V or a nonnarcotic, except
flunitrazepam or methamphetamine, from Schedule I-V to someone under 18 and 3
years junior (RCW 69.50.406)

Robbery
1 (RCW 9A.56.200)

Sexual
Exploitation (RCW 9.68A.040)

Vehicular
Homicide, by being under the influence of intoxicating liquor or any drug (RCW
46.61.520)

VIIIArson
1 (RCW 9A.48.020)

Deliver
or possess with intent to deliver methamphetamine (RCW 69.50.401(a)(1)(ii))

Homicide
by Watercraft, by the operation of any vessel in a reckless manner (RCW
79A.60.050)

Manslaughter
2 (RCW 9A.32.070)

Manufacture,
deliver, or possess with intent to deliver amphetamine (RCW
69.50.401(a)(1)(ii))

Manufacture,
deliver, or possess with intent to deliver heroin or cocaine (RCW
69.50.401(a)(1)(i))

Possession
of Ephedrine, Pseudoephedrine, or Anhydrous Ammonia with intent to manufacture
methamphetamine (RCW 69.50.440)

Promoting
Prostitution 1 (RCW 9A.88.070)

Selling
for profit (controlled or counterfeit) any controlled substance (RCW 69.50.410)

Theft
of Anhydrous Ammonia (RCW 69.55.010)

Vehicular
Homicide, by the operation of any vehicle in a reckless manner (RCW 46.61.520)

VIIBurglary
1 (RCW 9A.52.020)

Child
Molestation 2 (RCW 9A.44.086)

Dealing
in depictions of minor engaged in sexually explicit conduct (RCW 9.68A.050)

Drive-by
Shooting (RCW 9A.36.045)

Homicide
by Watercraft, by disregard for the safety of others (RCW 79A.60.050)

Indecent
Liberties (without forcible compulsion) (RCW 9A.44.100(1) (b) and (c))

Introducing
Contraband 1 (RCW 9A.76.140)

Involving
a minor in drug dealing (RCW 69.50.401(f))

Malicious
placement of an explosive 3 (RCW 70.74.270(3))

Sending,
bringing into state depictions of minor engaged in sexually explicit conduct
(RCW 9.68A.060)

Unlawful
Possession of a Firearm in the first degree (RCW 9.41.040(1)(a))

Use
of a Machine Gun in Commission of a Felony (RCW 9.41.225)

Vehicular
Homicide, by disregard for the safety of others (RCW 46.61.520)

VIBail
Jumping with Murder 1 (RCW 9A.76.170(3)(a))

Bribery
(RCW 9A.68.010)

Incest
1 (RCW 9A.64.020(1))

Intimidating
a Judge (RCW 9A.72.160)

Intimidating
a Juror/Witness (RCW 9A.72.110, 9A.72.130)

Malicious
placement of an imitation device 2 (RCW 70.74.272(1)(b))

Manufacture,
deliver, or possess with intent to deliver narcotics from Schedule I or II
(except heroin or cocaine) or flunitrazepam from Schedule IV (RCW
69.50.401(a)(1)(i))

Rape
of a Child 3 (RCW 9A.44.079)

Theft
of a Firearm (RCW 9A.56.300)

Unlawful
Storage of Anhydrous Ammonia (RCW 69.55.020)

VAbandonment
of dependent person 1 (RCW 9A.42.060)

Advancing
money or property for extortionate extension of credit (RCW 9A.82.030)

Bail
Jumping with class A Felony (RCW 9A.76.170(3)(b))

Child
Molestation 3 (RCW 9A.44.089)

Criminal
Mistreatment 1 (RCW 9A.42.020)

Custodial
Sexual Misconduct 1 (RCW 9A.44.160)

Delivery
of imitation controlled substance by person eighteen or over to person under
eighteen (RCW 69.52.030(2))

Domestic
Violence Court Order Violation (RCW 10.99.040, 10.99.050, 26.09.300, 26.10.220,
26.26.138, 26.50.110, 26.52.070, or 74.34.145)

Extortion
1 (RCW 9A.56.120)

Extortionate
Extension of Credit (RCW 9A.82.020)

Extortionate
Means to Collect Extensions of Credit (RCW 9A.82.040)

Incest
2 (RCW 9A.64.020(2))

Kidnapping
2 (RCW 9A.40.030)

Perjury
1 (RCW 9A.72.020)

Persistent
prison misbehavior (RCW 9.94.070)

Possession
of a Stolen Firearm (RCW 9A.56.310)

Rape
3 (RCW 9A.44.060)

Rendering
Criminal Assistance 1 (RCW 9A.76.070)

Sexual
Misconduct with a Minor 1 (RCW 9A.44.093)

Sexually
Violating Human Remains (RCW 9A.44.105)

Stalking
(RCW 9A.46.110)

IVArson
2 (RCW 9A.48.030)

Assault
2 (RCW 9A.36.021)

Assault
by Watercraft (RCW 79A.60.060)

Bribing
a Witness/Bribe Received by Witness (RCW 9A.72.090, 9A.72.100)

Commercial
Bribery (RCW 9A.68.060)

Counterfeiting
(RCW 9.16.035(4))

Escape
1 (RCW 9A.76.110)

Hit
and Run‑-Injury (RCW 46.52.020(4)(b))

Hit
and Run with Vessel‑-Injury Accident (RCW 79A.60.200(3))

Identity
Theft 1 (RCW 9.35.020(2)(a))

Indecent
Exposure to Person Under Age Fourteen (subsequent sex offense) (RCW 9A.88.010)

Influencing
Outcome of Sporting Event (RCW 9A.82.070)

Knowingly
Trafficking in Stolen Property (RCW 9A.82.050(2))

Malicious
Harassment (RCW 9A.36.080)

Manufacture,
deliver, or possess with intent to deliver narcotics from Schedule III, IV, or
V or nonnarcotics from Schedule I-V (except marijuana, amphetamine,
methamphetamines, or flunitrazepam) (RCW 69.50.401(a)(1) (iii) through (v))

Residential
Burglary (RCW 9A.52.025)

Robbery
2 (RCW 9A.56.210)

Theft
of Livestock 1 (RCW 9A.56.080)

Threats
to Bomb (RCW 9.61.160)

Use
of Proceeds of Criminal Profiteering (RCW 9A.82.080 (1) and (2))

Vehicular
Assault, by being under the influence of intoxicating liquor or any drug, or by
the operation or driving of a vehicle in a reckless manner (RCW 46.61.522)

Willful
Failure to Return from Furlough (RCW 72.66.060)

IIIAbandonment
of dependent person 2 (RCW 9A.42.070)

Assault
3 (RCW 9A.36.031)

Assault
of a Child 3 (RCW 9A.36.140)

Bail
Jumping with class B or C Felony (RCW 9A.76.170(3)(c))

Burglary
2 (RCW 9A.52.030)

Communication
with a Minor for Immoral Purposes (RCW 9.68A.090)

Criminal
Gang Intimidation (RCW 9A.46.120)

Criminal
Mistreatment 2 (RCW 9A.42.030)

Custodial
Assault (RCW 9A.36.100)

Delivery
of a material in lieu of a controlled substance (RCW 69.50.401(c))

Escape
2 (RCW 9A.76.120)

Extortion
2 (RCW 9A.56.130)

Harassment
(RCW 9A.46.020)

Intimidating
a Public Servant (RCW 9A.76.180)

Introducing
Contraband 2 (RCW 9A.76.150)

Maintaining
a Dwelling or Place for Controlled Substances (RCW 69.50.402(a)(6))

Malicious
Injury to Railroad Property (RCW 81.60.070)

Manufacture,
deliver, or possess with intent to deliver marijuana (RCW 69.50.401(a)(1)(iii))

Manufacture,
distribute, or possess with intent to distribute an imitation controlled
substance (RCW 69.52.030(1))

Patronizing
a Juvenile Prostitute (RCW 9.68A.100)

Perjury
2 (RCW 9A.72.030)

Possession
of Incendiary Device (RCW 9.40.120)

Possession
of Machine Gun or Short-Barreled Shotgun or Rifle (RCW 9.41.190)

Promoting
Prostitution 2 (RCW 9A.88.080)

Recklessly
Trafficking in Stolen Property (RCW 9A.82.050(1))

Securities
Act violation (RCW 21.20.400)

Tampering
with a Witness (RCW 9A.72.120)

Telephone
Harassment (subsequent conviction or threat of death) (RCW 9.61.230)

Theft
of Livestock 2 (RCW 9A.56.080)

Unlawful
Imprisonment (RCW 9A.40.040)

Unlawful
possession of firearm in the second degree (RCW 9.41.040(1)(b))

Unlawful
Use of Building for Drug Purposes (RCW 69.53.010)

Vehicular
Assault, by the operation or driving of a vehicle with disregard for the safety
of others (RCW 46.61.522)

Willful
Failure to Return from Work Release (RCW 72.65.070)

IIComputer
Trespass 1 (RCW 9A.52.110)

Counterfeiting
(RCW 9.16.035(3))

Create,
deliver, or possess a counterfeit controlled substance (RCW 69.50.401(b))

Escape
from Community Custody (RCW 72.09.310)

Health
Care False Claims (RCW 48.80.030)

Identity
Theft 2 (RCW 9.35.020(2)(b))

Improperly
Obtaining Financial Information (RCW 9.35.010)

Malicious
Mischief 1 (RCW 9A.48.070)

Possession
of controlled substance that is either heroin or narcotics from Schedule I or
II or flunitrazepam from Schedule IV (RCW 69.50.401(d))

Possession
of phencyclidine (PCP) (RCW 69.50.401(d))

Possession
of Stolen Property 1 (RCW 9A.56.150)

Theft
1 (RCW 9A.56.030)

Theft
of Rental, Leased, or Lease-purchased Property (valued at one thousand five
hundred dollars or more) (RCW 9A.56.096(4))

Trafficking
in Insurance Claims (RCW 48.30A.015)

Unlawful
Practice of Law (RCW 2.48.180)

Unlicensed
Practice of a Profession or Business (RCW 18.130.190(7))

IAttempting
to Elude a Pursuing Police Vehicle (RCW 46.61.024)

False
Verification for Welfare (RCW 74.08.055)

Forged
Prescription (RCW 69.41.020)

Forged
Prescription for a Controlled Substance (RCW 69.50.403)

Forgery
(RCW 9A.60.020)

Malicious
Mischief 2 (RCW 9A.48.080)

Possess
Controlled Substance that is a Narcotic from Schedule III, IV, or V or
Non-narcotic from Schedule I-V (except phencyclidine or flunitrazepam) (RCW
69.50.401(d))

Possession
of Stolen Property 2 (RCW 9A.56.160)

Reckless
Burning 1 (RCW 9A.48.040)

Taking
Motor Vehicle Without Permission (RCW 9A.56.070)

Theft
2 (RCW 9A.56.040)

Theft
of Rental, Leased, or Lease-purchased Property (valued at two hundred fifty
dollars or more but less than one thousand five hundred dollars) (RCW
9A.56.096(4))

Unlawful
Issuance of Checks or Drafts (RCW 9A.56.060)

Unlawful
Use of Food Stamps (RCW 9.91.140 (2) and (3))

Vehicle
Prowl 1 (RCW 9A.52.095)

Sec. 16. RCW 13.40.0357 and 2001
c 217 s 13 are each amended to read as follows:

DESCRIPTION
AND OFFENSE CATEGORY

juvenile juvenile
disposition

disposition category
for attempt,

offense bailjump,
conspiracy,

category description (rcw citation) or
solicitation

........................................

Arson
and Malicious Mischief

A Arson
1 (9A.48.020) B+

B Arson
2 (9A.48.030) C

C Reckless
Burning 1 (9A.48.040) D

D Reckless
Burning 2 (9A.48.050) E

B Malicious
Mischief 1 (9A.48.070) C

C Malicious
Mischief 2 (9A.48.080) D

D Malicious Mischief 3 (<$50 is

E
class) (9A.48.090) E

E Tampering with Fire Alarm

Apparatus
(9.40.100) E

A Possession of Incendiary Device

(9.40.120) B+

Assault and Other Crimes

Involving Physical Harm

A Assault
1 (9A.36.011) B+

B+ Assault
2 (9A.36.021) C+

C+ Assault
3 (9A.36.031) D+

D+ Assault
4 (9A.36.041) E

B+ Drive-By Shooting

(9A.36.045) C+

D+ Reckless Endangerment

(9A.36.050) E

C+ Promoting Suicide Attempt

(9A.36.060) D+

D+ Coercion
(9A.36.070) E

C+ Custodial
Assault (9A.36.100) D+

Burglary
and Trespass

B+ Burglary
1 (9A.52.020) C+

B Residential Burglary

(9A.52.025) C

B Burglary
2 (9A.52.030) C

D Burglary Tools (Possession of)

(9A.52.060) E

D Criminal
Trespass 1 (9A.52.070) E

E Criminal Trespass 2 (9A.52.080) E

C Vehicle Prowling 1 (9A.52.095) D

D Vehicle
Prowling 2 (9A.52.100) E

Drugs

E Possession/Consumption of Alcohol

(66.44.270) E

C Illegally Obtaining Legend Drug

(69.41.020) D

C+ Sale, Delivery, Possession of
Legend

Drug with Intent to Sell

(69.41.030) D+

E Possession of Legend Drug

(69.41.030) E

B+ Violation of Uniform Controlled

Substances Act - Narcotic,

Methamphetamine, or Flunitrazepam

Sale
(69.50.401(a)(1) (i) or (ii)) B+

C Violation of Uniform Controlled

Substances Act - Nonnarcotic Sale

(69.50.401(a)(1)(iii)) C

E Possession of Marihuana <40
grams

(69.50.401(e)) E

C Fraudulently Obtaining Controlled

Substance
(69.50.403) C

C+ Sale of Controlled Substance

for
Profit (69.50.410) C+

E Unlawful
Inhalation (9.47A.020) E

B Violation of Uniform Controlled

Substances Act - Narcotic,

Methamphetamine,
or Flunitrazepam

Counterfeit Substances

(69.50.401(b)(1)
(i) or (ii)) B

C Violation of Uniform Controlled

Substances
Act - Nonnarcotic

Counterfeit Substances

(69.50.401(b)(1)
(iii), (iv), (v)) C

C Violation of Uniform Controlled

Substances
Act - Possession of a

Controlled Substance

(69.50.401(d)) C

C Violation of Uniform Controlled

Substances
Act - Possession of a

Controlled Substance

(69.50.401(c)) C

Firearms
and Weapons

B Theft
of Firearm (9A.56.300) C

B Possession of Stolen Firearm

(9A.56.310) C

E Carrying Loaded Pistol Without

Permit
(9.41.050) E

C Possession of Firearms by Minor
(<18)

(9.41.040(1)(b)(iii)) C

D+ Possession of Dangerous Weapon

(9.41.250) E

D Intimidating Another Person by use

of
Weapon (9.41.270) E

Homicide

A+ Murder
1 (9A.32.030) A

A+ Murder
2 (9A.32.050) B+

B+ Manslaughter
1 (9A.32.060) C+

C+ Manslaughter
2 (9A.32.070) D+

B+ Vehicular
Homicide (46.61.520) C+

Kidnapping

A Kidnap
1 (9A.40.020) B+

B+ Kidnap
2 (9A.40.030) C+

C+ Unlawful Imprisonment

(9A.40.040) D+

Obstructing Governmental Operation

D Obstructing a Law Enforcement

Officer
(9A.76.020) E

E Resisting
Arrest (9A.76.040) E

B Introducing Contraband 1

(9A.76.140) C

C Introducing Contraband 2

(9A.76.150) D

E Introducing Contraband 3

(9A.76.160) E

B+ Intimidating a Public Servant

(9A.76.180) C+

B+ Intimidating a Witness

(9A.72.110) C+

Public Disturbance

C+ Riot
with Weapon (9A.84.010) D+

D+ Riot Without Weapon

(9A.84.010) E

E Failure to Disperse (9A.84.020) E

E Disorderly
Conduct (9A.84.030) E

Sex Crimes

A Rape
1 (9A.44.040) B+

A- Rape
2 (9A.44.050) B+

C+ Rape
3 (9A.44.060) D+

A- Rape
of a Child 1 (9A.44.073) B+

B+ Rape
of a Child 2 (9A.44.076) C+

B Incest
1 (9A.64.020(1)) C

C Incest
2 (9A.64.020(2)) D

D+ Indecent Exposure

(Victim
<14) (9A.88.010) E

E Indecent
Exposure

(Victim
14 or over) (9A.88.010) E

B+ Promoting
Prostitution 1

(9A.88.070) C+

C+ Promoting Prostitution 2

(9A.88.080) D+

E O
& A (Prostitution) (9A.88.030) E

B+ Indecent
Liberties (9A.44.100) C+

A- Child
Molestation 1 (9A.44.083) B+

B Child
Molestation 2 (9A.44.086) C+

Terrorism

A+ Terrorism in the First

Degree
(section 3 of this act) A

A Terrorism
in the Second Degree

(section
4 of this act) B+

B+ Unlawful
Use or Possession

of
Weapon of Mass Destruction

(section
5 of this act) C+

B Threatening
Acts of Terrorism 1

(section
6(1)(a) of this act) C

C+ Providing
Material Support or

Resources
to Terrorists (section

7
of this act) D+

C Unlawful
Possession of False

Identification
for Terrorist Purposes

(section
8 of this act) D

D+ Threatening
Acts of Terrorism 2

(section
6(1)(b) of this act) E

Theft, Robbery, Extortion, and
Forgery

B Theft
1 (9A.56.030) C

C Theft
2 (9A.56.040) D

D Theft
3 (9A.56.050) E

B Theft
of Livestock (9A.56.080) C

C Forgery
(9A.60.020) D

A Robbery
1 (9A.56.200) B+

B+ Robbery
2 (9A.56.210) C+

B+ Extortion
1 (9A.56.120) C+

C+ Extortion
2 (9A.56.130) D+

C Identity
Theft 1 (9.35.020(2)(a)) D

D Identity
Theft 2 (9.35.020(2)(b)) E

D Improperly
Obtaining Financial

Information
(([(9.35.010)]))

(9.35.010) E

B Possession of Stolen Property 1

(9A.56.150) C

C Possession of Stolen Property 2

(9A.56.160) D

D Possession of Stolen Property 3

(9A.56.170) E

C Taking Motor Vehicle Without

Owner's
Permission (9A.56.070) D

Motor Vehicle Related Crimes

E Driving Without a License

(46.20.005) E

B+ Hit
and Run - Death

(46.52.020(4)(a)) C+

C Hit and Run - Injury

(46.52.020(4)(b)) D

D Hit and Run-Attended

(46.52.020(5)) E

E Hit and Run-Unattended

(46.52.010) E

C Vehicular
Assault (46.61.522) D

C Attempting to Elude Pursuing

Police
Vehicle (46.61.024) D

E Reckless
Driving (46.61.500) E

D Driving While Under the Influence

(46.61.502
and 46.61.504) E

Other

B Bomb
Threat (9.61.160) C

C Escape
11 (9A.76.110) C

C Escape
21 (9A.76.120) C

D Escape
3 (9A.76.130) E

E Obscene,
Harassing, Etc.,

Phone
Calls (9.61.230) E

A Other
Offense Equivalent to an

Adult
Class A Felony B+

B Other
Offense Equivalent to an

Adult
Class B Felony C

C Other
Offense Equivalent to an

Adult
Class C Felony D

D Other
Offense Equivalent to an

Adult
Gross Misdemeanor E

E Other
Offense Equivalent to an

Adult
Misdemeanor E

V Violation
of Order of Restitution,

Community
Supervision, or

Confinement
(13.40.200)2 V

1Escape 1 and 2 and Attempted Escape 1 and 2 are classed as C
offenses and the standard range is established as follows:

1st escape or attempted
escape during 12-month period - 4 weeks confinement

2nd escape or attempted
escape during 12-month period - 8 weeks confinement

3rd and subsequent
escape or attempted escape during 12-month period - 12 weeks confinement

2If
the court finds that a respondent has violated terms of an order, it may impose
a penalty of up to 30 days of confinement.

JUVENILE
SENTENCING STANDARDS

This
schedule must be used for juvenile offenders. The court may select sentencing
option A, B, or C.

OPTION
A

JUVENILE
OFFENDER SENTENCING GRID

STANDARD
RANGE

A+ 180 WEEKS TO AGE 21 YEARS

A 103 WEEKS TO 129 WEEKS

A- 15-36 |52-65 |80-100 |103-129

WEEKS |WEEKS |WEEKS|WEEKS

EXCEPT | | |

30-40 | | |

WEEKS FOR | | |

15-17 | | |

YEAR OLDS | | |

Current B+ 15-36 |52-65 |80-100 |103-129

Offense WEEKS |WEEKS |WEEKS |WEEKS

Category

B LOCAL | |52-65

SANCTIONS (LS) |15-36 WEEKS |WEEKS

C+ LS |

|15-36 WEEKS

C LS |15-36 WEEKS

Local Sanctions: |

0 to 30 Days

D+ LS 0 to 12 Months Community Supervision

0 to 150 Hours Community Service

D LS $0 to $500 Fine

E LS

0 1 2 3 4 or more

PRIOR ADJUDICATIONS

NOTE: References in the
grid to days or weeks mean periods of confinement.

(1) The vertical axis
of the grid is the current offense category. The current offense category is
determined by the offense of adjudication.

(2) The horizontal axis
of the grid is the number of prior adjudications included in the juvenile's
criminal history. Each prior felony adjudication shall count as one point.
Each prior violation, misdemeanor, and gross misdemeanor adjudication shall
count as 1/4 point. Fractional points shall be rounded down.

(3) The standard range
disposition for each offense is determined by the intersection of the column
defined by the prior adjudications and the row defined by the current offense
category.

(4) RCW 13.40.180
applies if the offender is being sentenced for more than one offense.

(5) A current offense
that is a violation is equivalent to an offense category of E. However, a
disposition for a violation shall not include confinement.

OR

OPTION
B

CHEMICAL
DEPENDENCY DISPOSITION ALTERNATIVE

If the juvenile
offender is subject to a standard range disposition of local sanctions or 15 to
36 weeks of confinement and has not committed an A- or B+ offense, the court
may impose a disposition under RCW 13.40.160(4) and 13.40.165.

OR

OPTION
C

MANIFEST
INJUSTICE

If the court
determines that a disposition under option A or B would effectuate a manifest
injustice, the court shall impose a disposition outside the standard range
under RCW 13.40.160(2).

Sec. 17. RCW 9.94A.030 and 2001
2nd sp.s. c 12 s 301, 2001 c 300 s 3, and 2001 c 7 s 2 are each reenacted and
amended to read as follows:

Unless the context
clearly requires otherwise, the definitions in this section apply throughout
this chapter.

(1) "Board"
means the indeterminate sentence review board created under chapter 9.95 RCW.

(2)
"Collect," or any derivative thereof, "collect and remit,"
or "collect and deliver," when used with reference to the department,
means that the department, either directly or through a collection agreement
authorized by RCW 9.94A.760, is responsible for monitoring and enforcing the
offender's sentence with regard to the legal financial obligation, receiving
payment thereof from the offender, and, consistent with current law, delivering
daily the entire payment to the superior court clerk without depositing it in a
departmental account.

(3)
"Commission" means the sentencing guidelines commission.

(4) "Community
corrections officer" means an employee of the department who is
responsible for carrying out specific duties in supervision of sentenced
offenders and monitoring of sentence conditions.

(5) "Community
custody" means that portion of an offender's sentence of confinement in
lieu of earned release time or imposed pursuant to RCW 9.94A.505(2)(b),
9.94A.650 through 9.94A.670, 9.94A.690, 9.94A.700 through 9.94A.715, or
9.94A.545, served in the community subject to controls placed on the offender's
movement and activities by the department. For offenders placed on community
custody for crimes committed on or after July 1, 2000, the department shall
assess the offender's risk of reoffense and may establish and modify conditions
of community custody, in addition to those imposed by the court, based upon the
risk to community safety.

(6) "Community
custody range" means the minimum and maximum period of community custody
included as part of a sentence under RCW 9.94A.715, as established by the
commission or the legislature under RCW 9.94A.850, for crimes committed on or
after July 1, 2000.

(7) "Community
placement" means that period during which the offender is subject to the
conditions of community custody and/or postrelease supervision, which begins
either upon completion of the term of confinement (postrelease supervision) or
at such time as the offender is transferred to community custody in lieu of
earned release. Community placement may consist of entirely community custody,
entirely postrelease supervision, or a combination of the two.

(8) "Community
service" means compulsory service, without compensation, performed for the
benefit of the community by the offender.

(9) "Community
supervision" means a period of time during which a convicted offender is
subject to crime-related prohibitions and other sentence conditions imposed by
a court pursuant to this chapter or RCW 16.52.200(6) or 46.61.524. Where the
court finds that any offender has a chemical dependency that has contributed to
his or her offense, the conditions of supervision may, subject to available
resources, include treatment. For purposes of the interstate compact for
out-of-state supervision of parolees and probationers, RCW 9.95.270, community
supervision is the functional equivalent of probation and should be considered
the same as probation by other states.

(10)
"Confinement" means total or partial confinement.

(11)
"Conviction" means an adjudication of guilt pursuant to Titles 10 or
13 RCW and includes a verdict of guilty, a finding of guilty, and acceptance of
a plea of guilty.

(12)
"Crime-related prohibition" means an order of a court prohibiting
conduct that directly relates to the circumstances of the crime for which the
offender has been convicted, and shall not be construed to mean orders
directing an offender affirmatively to participate in rehabilitative programs
or to otherwise perform affirmative conduct. However, affirmative acts
necessary to monitor compliance with the order of a court may be required by
the department.

(13) "Criminal
history" means the list of a defendant's prior convictions and juvenile
adjudications, whether in this state, in federal court, or elsewhere. The
history shall include, where known, for each conviction (a) whether the
defendant has been placed on probation and the length and terms thereof; and
(b) whether the defendant has been incarcerated and the length of
incarceration.

(14) "Day
fine" means a fine imposed by the sentencing court that equals the
difference between the offender's net daily income and the reasonable
obligations that the offender has for the support of the offender and any
dependents.

(15) "Day
reporting" means a program of enhanced supervision designed to monitor the
offender's daily activities and compliance with sentence conditions, and in
which the offender is required to report daily to a specific location
designated by the department or the sentencing court.

(16)
"Department" means the department of corrections.

(17) "Determinate
sentence" means a sentence that states with exactitude the number of
actual years, months, or days of total confinement, of partial confinement, of
community supervision, the number of actual hours or days of community service
work, or dollars or terms of a legal financial obligation. The fact that an
offender through earned release can reduce the actual period of confinement
shall not affect the classification of the sentence as a determinate sentence.

(18) "Disposable
earnings" means that part of the earnings of an offender remaining after
the deduction from those earnings of any amount required by law to be
withheld. For the purposes of this definition, "earnings" means
compensation paid or payable for personal services, whether denominated as
wages, salary, commission, bonuses, or otherwise, and, notwithstanding any
other provision of law making the payments exempt from garnishment, attachment,
or other process to satisfy a court-ordered legal financial obligation,
specifically includes periodic payments pursuant to pension or retirement
programs, or insurance policies of any type, but does not include payments made
under Title 50 RCW, except as provided in RCW 50.40.020 and 50.40.050, or Title
74 RCW.

(19) "Drug
offender sentencing alternative" is a sentencing option available to
persons convicted of a felony offense other than a violent offense or a sex
offense and who are eligible for the option under RCW 9.94A.660.

(20) "Drug
offense" means:

(a) Any felony
violation of chapter 69.50 RCW except possession of a controlled substance (RCW
69.50.401(d)) or forged prescription for a controlled substance (RCW
69.50.403);

(b) Any offense defined
as a felony under federal law that relates to the possession, manufacture,
distribution, or transportation of a controlled substance; or

(c) Any out-of-state
conviction for an offense that under the laws of this state would be a felony
classified as a drug offense under (a) of this subsection.

(21) "Earned
release" means earned release from confinement as provided in RCW
9.94A.728.

(22) "Escape"
means:

(a) Sexually violent
predator escape (RCW 9A.76.115), escape in the first degree (RCW 9A.76.110),
escape in the second degree (RCW 9A.76.120), willful failure to return from
furlough (RCW 72.66.060), willful failure to return from work release (RCW
72.65.070), or willful failure to be available for supervision by the
department while in community custody (RCW 72.09.310); or

(b) Any federal or
out-of-state conviction for an offense that under the laws of this state would
be a felony classified as an escape under (a) of this subsection.

(23) "Felony
traffic offense" means:

(a) Vehicular homicide
(RCW 46.61.520), vehicular assault (RCW 46.61.522), eluding a police officer
(RCW 46.61.024), or felony hit-and-run injury-accident (RCW 46.52.020(4)); or

(b) Any federal or
out-of-state conviction for an offense that under the laws of this state would
be a felony classified as a felony traffic offense under (a) of this
subsection.

(24) "Fine"
means a specific sum of money ordered by the sentencing court to be paid by the
offender to the court over a specific period of time.

(25) "First-time
offender" means any person who has no prior convictions for a felony and
is eligible for the first-time offender waiver under RCW 9.94A.650.

(26) "Home
detention" means a program of partial confinement available to offenders
wherein the offender is confined in a private residence subject to electronic
surveillance.

(27) "Legal
financial obligation" means a sum of money that is ordered by a superior
court of the state of Washington for legal financial obligations which may
include restitution to the victim, statutorily imposed crime victims'
compensation fees as assessed pursuant to RCW 7.68.035, court costs, county or
interlocal drug funds, court-appointed attorneys' fees, and costs of defense,
fines, and any other financial obligation that is assessed to the offender as a
result of a felony conviction. Upon conviction for vehicular assault while
under the influence of intoxicating liquor or any drug, RCW 46.61.522(1)(b), or
vehicular homicide while under the influence of intoxicating liquor or any
drug, RCW 46.61.520(1)(a), legal financial obligations may also include payment
to a public agency of the expense of an emergency response to the incident
resulting in the conviction, subject to RCW 38.52.430.

(28) "Most serious
offense" means any of the following felonies or a felony attempt to commit
any of the following felonies:

(a) Any felony defined
under any law as a class A felony or criminal solicitation of or criminal conspiracy
to commit a class A felony;

(b) Assault in the
second degree;

(c) Assault of a child
in the second degree;

(d) Child molestation
in the second degree;

(e) Controlled
substance homicide;

(f) Extortion in the
first degree;

(g) Incest when committed
against a child under age fourteen;

(h) Indecent liberties;

(i) Kidnapping in the
second degree;

(j) Leading organized
crime;

(k) Manslaughter in the
first degree;

(l) Manslaughter in the
second degree;

(m) Promoting
prostitution in the first degree;

(n) Rape in the third
degree;

(o) Robbery in the
second degree;

(p) Sexual
exploitation;

(q) Vehicular assault,
when caused by the operation or driving of a vehicle by a person while under
the influence of intoxicating liquor or any drug or by the operation or driving
of a vehicle in a reckless manner;

(r) Vehicular homicide,
when proximately caused by the driving of any vehicle by any person while under
the influence of intoxicating liquor or any drug as defined by RCW 46.61.502,
or by the operation of any vehicle in a reckless manner;

(s) Any other class B
felony offense with a finding of sexual motivation;

(t) Any other felony
with a deadly weapon verdict under RCW 9.94A.602;

(u) Any felony offense
in effect at any time prior to December 2, 1993, that is comparable to a most
serious offense under this subsection, or any federal or out-of-state
conviction for an offense that under the laws of this state would be a felony
classified as a most serious offense under this subsection;

(v)(i) A prior
conviction for indecent liberties under RCW 9A.88.100(1) (a), (b), and (c),
chapter 260, Laws of 1975 1st ex. sess. as it existed until July 1, 1979, RCW
9A.44.100(1) (a), (b), and (c) as it existed from July 1, 1979, until June 11,
1986, and RCW 9A.44.100(1) (a), (b), and (d) as it existed from June 11, 1986,
until July 1, 1988;

(ii) A prior conviction
for indecent liberties under RCW 9A.44.100(1)(c) as it existed from June 11,
1986, until July 1, 1988, if: (A) The crime was committed against a child
under the age of fourteen; or (B) the relationship between the victim and
perpetrator is included in the definition of indecent liberties under RCW
9A.44.100(1)(c) as it existed from July 1, 1988, through July 27, 1997, or RCW
9A.44.100(1) (d) or (e) as it existed from July 25, 1993, through July 27,
1997.

(29) "Nonviolent
offense" means an offense which is not a violent offense.

(30)
"Offender" means a person who has committed a felony established by
state law and is eighteen years of age or older or is less than eighteen years
of age but whose case is under superior court jurisdiction under RCW 13.04.030
or has been transferred by the appropriate juvenile court to a criminal court
pursuant to RCW 13.40.110. Throughout this chapter, the terms
"offender" and "defendant" are used interchangeably.

(31) "Partial
confinement" means confinement for no more than one year in a facility or
institution operated or utilized under contract by the state or any other unit
of government, or, if home detention or work crew has been ordered by the
court, in an approved residence, for a substantial portion of each day with the
balance of the day spent in the community. Partial confinement includes work
release, home detention, work crew, and a combination of work crew and home
detention.

(32) "Persistent
offender" is an offender who:

(a)(i) Has been
convicted in this state of any felony considered a most serious offense; and

(ii) Has, before the
commission of the offense under (a) of this subsection, been convicted as an
offender on at least two separate occasions, whether in this state or
elsewhere, of felonies that under the laws of this state would be considered
most serious offenses and would be included in the offender score under RCW
9.94A.525; provided that of the two or more previous convictions, at least one
conviction must have occurred before the commission of any of the other most
serious offenses for which the offender was previously convicted; or

(b)(i) Has been
convicted of: (A) Rape in the first degree, rape of a child in the first
degree, child molestation in the first degree, rape in the second degree, rape
of a child in the second degree, or indecent liberties by forcible compulsion;
(B) any of the following offenses with a finding of sexual motivation: Murder
in the first degree, murder in the second degree, homicide by abuse, kidnapping
in the first degree, kidnapping in the second degree, assault in the first
degree, assault in the second degree, assault of a child in the first degree,
or burglary in the first degree; or (C) an attempt to commit any crime listed
in this subsection (32)(b)(i); and

(ii) Has, before the
commission of the offense under (b)(i) of this subsection, been convicted as an
offender on at least one occasion, whether in this state or elsewhere, of an
offense listed in (b)(i) of this subsection or any federal or out-of-state offense
or offense under prior Washington law that is comparable to the offenses listed
in (b)(i) of this subsection. A conviction for rape of a child in the first
degree constitutes a conviction under (b)(i) of this subsection only when the
offender was sixteen years of age or older when the offender committed the
offense. A conviction for rape of a child in the second degree constitutes a
conviction under (b)(i) of this subsection only when the offender was eighteen
years of age or older when the offender committed the offense.

(33) "Postrelease
supervision" is that portion of an offender's community placement that is
not community custody.

(34)
"Restitution" means a specific sum of money ordered by the sentencing
court to be paid by the offender to the court over a specified period of time
as payment of damages. The sum may include both public and private costs.

(35) "Risk
assessment" means the application of an objective instrument supported by
research and adopted by the department for the purpose of assessing an
offender's risk of reoffense, taking into consideration the nature of the harm
done by the offender, place and circumstances of the offender related to risk,
the offender's relationship to any victim, and any information provided to the
department by victims. The results of a risk assessment shall not be based on
unconfirmed or unconfirmable allegations.

(36) "Serious
traffic offense" means:

(a) Driving while under
the influence of intoxicating liquor or any drug (RCW 46.61.502), actual physical
control while under the influence of intoxicating liquor or any drug (RCW
46.61.504), reckless driving (RCW 46.61.500), or hit-and-run an attended
vehicle (RCW 46.52.020(5)); or

(b) Any federal,
out-of-state, county, or municipal conviction for an offense that under the
laws of this state would be classified as a serious traffic offense under (a)
of this subsection.

(37) "Serious
violent offense" is a subcategory of violent offense and means:

(a)(i) Murder in the
first degree;

(ii) Homicide by abuse;

(iii) Murder in the
second degree;

(iv) Manslaughter in
the first degree;

(v) Assault in the
first degree;

(vi) Kidnapping in the
first degree;

(vii) Rape in the first
degree;

(viii) Assault of a
child in the first degree; ((or))

(ix) Terrorism in
the first degree (RCW 9A.--.--- (section 3 of this act));

(x) Terrorism in the
second degree (RCW 9A.--.--- (section 4 of this act));

(xi) Unlawful use or
possession of a weapon of mass destruction (RCW 9A.--.--- (section 5 of this
act)); or

(xii) An
attempt, criminal solicitation, or criminal conspiracy to commit one of these
felonies; or

(b) Any federal or
out-of-state conviction for an offense that under the laws of this state would
be a felony classified as a serious violent offense under (a) of this
subsection.

(38) "Sex
offense" means:

(a)(i) A felony that is
a violation of chapter 9A.44 RCW other than RCW 9A.44.130(11);

(ii) A violation of RCW
9A.64.020;

(iii) A felony that is
a violation of chapter 9.68A RCW other than RCW 9.68A.070 or 9.68A.080; or

(iv) A felony that is,
under chapter 9A.28 RCW, a criminal attempt, criminal solicitation, or criminal
conspiracy to commit such crimes;

(b) Any conviction for
a felony offense in effect at any time prior to July 1, 1976, that is
comparable to a felony classified as a sex offense in (a) of this subsection;

(c) A felony with a
finding of sexual motivation under RCW 9.94A.835 or 13.40.135; or

(d) Any federal or
out-of-state conviction for an offense that under the laws of this state would
be a felony classified as a sex offense under (a) of this subsection.

(39) "Sexual
motivation" means that one of the purposes for which the defendant
committed the crime was for the purpose of his or her sexual gratification.

(40) "Standard
sentence range" means the sentencing court's discretionary range in
imposing a nonappealable sentence.

(41) "Statutory
maximum sentence" means the maximum length of time for which an offender
may be confined as punishment for a crime as prescribed in chapter 9A.20 RCW,
RCW 9.92.010, the statute defining the crime, or other statute defining the
maximum penalty for a crime.

(42) "Total
confinement" means confinement inside the physical boundaries of a
facility or institution operated or utilized under contract by the state or any
other unit of government for twenty-four hours a day, or pursuant to RCW
72.64.050 and 72.64.060.

(43) "Transition
training" means written and verbal instructions and assistance provided by
the department to the offender during the two weeks prior to the offender's
successful completion of the work ethic camp program. The transition training
shall include instructions in the offender's requirements and obligations
during the offender's period of community custody.

(44) "Victim"
means any person who has sustained emotional, psychological, physical, or
financial injury to person or property as a direct result of the crime charged.

(45) "Violent
offense" means:

(a) Any of the
following felonies:

(i) Any felony defined
under any law as a class A felony or an attempt to commit a class A felony;

(ii) Criminal
solicitation of or criminal conspiracy to commit a class A felony;

(iii) Manslaughter in
the first degree;

(iv) Manslaughter in
the second degree;

(v) Indecent liberties
if committed by forcible compulsion;

(vi) Kidnapping in the
second degree;

(vii) Arson in the
second degree;

(viii) Assault in the
second degree;

(ix) Assault of a child
in the second degree;

(x) Extortion in the
first degree;

(xi) Robbery in the
second degree;

(xii) Drive-by
shooting;

(xiii) Vehicular
assault, when caused by the operation or driving of a vehicle by a person while
under the influence of intoxicating liquor or any drug or by the operation or
driving of a vehicle in a reckless manner; and

(xiv) Vehicular
homicide, when proximately caused by the driving of any vehicle by any person
while under the influence of intoxicating liquor or any drug as defined by RCW
46.61.502, or by the operation of any vehicle in a reckless manner;

(b) Any conviction for
a felony offense in effect at any time prior to July 1, 1976, that is
comparable to a felony classified as a violent offense in (a) of this
subsection; and

(c) Any federal or
out-of-state conviction for an offense that under the laws of this state would
be a felony classified as a violent offense under (a) or (b) of this
subsection.

(46) "Work
crew" means a program of partial confinement consisting of civic
improvement tasks for the benefit of the community that complies with RCW
9.94A.725.

(47) "Work ethic
camp" means an alternative incarceration program as provided in RCW
9.94A.690 designed to reduce recidivism and lower the cost of corrections by
requiring offenders to complete a comprehensive array of real-world job and
vocational experiences, character-building work ethics training, life
management skills development, substance abuse rehabilitation, counseling,
literacy training, and basic adult education.

(48) "Work
release" means a program of partial confinement available to offenders who
are employed or engaged as a student in a regular course of study at school.

Sec. 18. RCW 9A.04.080 and 1998 c
221 s 2 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) Prosecutions for
criminal offenses shall not be commenced after the periods prescribed in this
section.

(a) The following
offenses may be prosecuted at any time after their commission:

(i) Murder;

(ii) Any offense
defined in chapter 9A.‑- RCW (sections 1 through 8 and 19 through 25 of
this act);

(iii) Homicide
by abuse;

(((iii))) (iv)
Arson if a death results;

(((iv))) (v)
Vehicular homicide;

(((v))) (vi)
Vehicular assault if a death results;

(((vi))) (vii)
Hit-and-run injury-accident if a death results (RCW 46.52.020(4)).

(b) The following
offenses shall not be prosecuted more than ten years after their commission:

(i) Any felony
committed by a public officer if the commission is in connection with the
duties of his or her office or constitutes a breach of his or her public duty
or a violation of the oath of office;

(ii) Arson if no death
results; or

(iii) Violations of RCW
9A.44.040 or 9A.44.050 if the rape is reported to a law enforcement agency
within one year of its commission; except that if the victim is under fourteen
years of age when the rape is committed and the rape is reported to a law
enforcement agency within one year of its commission, the violation may be
prosecuted up to three years after the victim's eighteenth birthday or up to
ten years after the rape's commission, whichever is later. If a violation of
RCW 9A.44.040 or 9A.44.050 is not reported within one year, the rape may not be
prosecuted: (A) More than three years after its commission if the violation
was committed against a victim fourteen years of age or older; or (B) more than
three years after the victim's eighteenth birthday or more than seven years
after the rape's commission, whichever is later, if the violation was committed
against a victim under fourteen years of age.

(c) Violations of the
following statutes shall not be prosecuted more than three years after the
victim's eighteenth birthday or more than seven years after their commission,
whichever is later: RCW 9A.44.073, 9A.44.076, 9A.44.083, 9A.44.086, 9A.44.070,
9A.44.080, 9A.44.100(1)(b), or 9A.64.020.

(d) The following
offenses shall not be prosecuted more than six years after their commission:
Violations of RCW 9A.82.060 or 9A.82.080.

(e) The following
offenses shall not be prosecuted more than five years after their commission:
Any class C felony under chapter 74.09, 82.36, or 82.38 RCW.

(f) Bigamy shall not be
prosecuted more than three years after the time specified in RCW 9A.64.010.

(g) A violation of RCW
9A.56.030 must not be prosecuted more than three years after the discovery of
the offense when the victim is a tax exempt corporation under 26 U.S.C. Sec.
501(c)(3).

(h) No other felony may
be prosecuted more than three years after its commission; except that in a
prosecution under RCW 9A.44.115, if the person who was viewed, photographed, or
filmed did not realize at the time that he or she was being viewed,
photographed, or filmed, the prosecution must be commenced within two years of
the time the person who was viewed or in the photograph or film first learns
that he or she was viewed, photographed, or filmed.

(i) No gross
misdemeanor may be prosecuted more than two years after its commission.

(j) No misdemeanor may
be prosecuted more than one year after its commission.

(2) The periods of
limitation prescribed in subsection (1) of this section do not run during any
time when the person charged is not usually and publicly resident within this
state.

(3) If, before the end
of a period of limitation prescribed in subsection (1) of this section, an
indictment has been found or a complaint or an information has been filed, and
the indictment, complaint, or information is set aside, then the period of
limitation is extended by a period equal to the length of time from the finding
or filing to the setting aside.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
19. CRIMINAL PENALTIES
ADDITIONAL TO CIVIL AND ADMINISTRATIVE SANCTIONS. The penalties imposed
pursuant to this chapter shall be in addition to, and not in lieu of, all other
civil, administrative, and other penalties and remedies provided for by other
laws providing penalties or remedies for actions or conduct which also
constitutes a violation of this chapter.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
20. ADDITIONAL PENALTIES. In
addition to all other penalties, criminal or civil, and any other provision of
law notwithstanding, any person convicted of any of the offenses described in
this chapter shall be ordered by the sentencing court to:

(1) Make restitution
for actual damages sustained to those persons or entities injured by the
commission of any of the offenses described in this chapter;

(2) Make restitution of
all costs and expenses incurred by the state or county in the investigation and
prosecution of the offense, including any costs of defense provided at public
expense.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
21. ANTIMERGER PROVISION.
Every person who, in the commission of an offense defined by this chapter,
commits any other crime may be punished therefor, as well as for the violation
of this chapter, and may be prosecuted for each crime separately.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
22. SECTION CAPTIONS.
Section captions as used in this chapter do not constitute any part of the law.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
23. SEVERABILITY. If any
provision of this act or its application to any person or circumstance is held
invalid, the remainder of the act or the application of the provision to other
persons or circumstances is not affected.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
24. SHORT TITLE. This act
shall be known as the Washington AntiTerrorism Act of 2002.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
25. DECLARING AN EMERGENCY.
This act is necessary for the immediate preservation of the public peace, health,
or safety, or support of the state government and its existing public
institutions, and takes effect immediately.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 26. CODIFICATION
INSTRUCTIONS. Sections 1 through 8 and 19 through 25 of this act constitute a
new chapter in Title 9A RCW.

---
END ---