BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF
WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1. RCW 84.36.010 and 1998 c
179 s 8 are each amended to read as follows:

All
property belonging exclusively to the United States, the state, or any
county or municipal corporation((,)); all property belonging
exclusively to any federally recognized Indian tribe located in the state, if
that property is used exclusively for essential government services as defined
in RCW 43.06.455; all state route number 16 corridor transportation systems
and facilities constructed under chapter 47.46 RCW((,)); and all
property under a financing contract pursuant to chapter 39.94 RCW or recorded agreement
granting immediate possession and use to ((said)) the public
bodies listed in this section or under an order of immediate possession
and use pursuant to RCW 8.04.090((,)); shall be exempt from
taxation. All property belonging exclusively to a foreign national government
shall be exempt from taxation if such property is used exclusively as an office
or residence for a consul or other official representative of such foreign
national government, and if the consul or other official representative is a
citizen of such foreign nation.

--- END ---