BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF
WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec.
1. A new section is added
to chapter 82.32 RCW to read as follows:

(1) Fifty percent of
the tax collected under RCW 82.08.020(1) by sellers in public parks during new
events shall be distributed to the governmental entity that owns the park. As
used in this section, "new event" means a festival, promotion, or
other event that is not substantially identical to an event held in the park
before the effective date of this section.

(2) Money distributed
under this section may be used only as additional resources for the support of
public parks and may not be used to supplant other sources of funding for those
purposes. Money distributed under this section may not be used to purchase
real estate.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 2. This act takes effect
July 1, 2002.

---
END ---