BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF
WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec.
1. A new section is added
to chapter 10.58 RCW to read as follows:

In all
criminal and juvenile offense proceedings where independent proof of the corpus
delicti is absent, a lawfully obtained confession or admission of the defendant
nevertheless shall be admitted into evidence if there is substantial
independent evidence that would tend to establish the trustworthiness of the
confession or admission.

--- END ---