BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF
WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec.
1. The legislature finds
that children in the state face many preventable exposures to environmental
hazards in their schools, homes, and communities. In certain cases children
are at greater risk than adults for exposure to and possible illness from
environmental hazards. This is due in part to their behaviors but also to
their decreased ability to detoxify certain substances due to the immaturity of
their body organs and immune systems.

The legislature further
finds that higher rates of poverty place children of ethnic and minority
communities at disproportionate risk for environmental exposures due to
inadequate housing, poor nutrition, and limited access to health care. Solutions
to complex environmental health problems require the ongoing communication,
collaboration, and cooperation of affected communities.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
2. (1) The children's
environmental health and protection advisory council is created.

(2) Membership of the
advisory council shall consist of thirteen members. The president of the
senate shall appoint one member of the majority party and one member of the
minority party. The speaker of the house of representatives shall appoint one
member from each party. The other members shall include: The secretary of the
department of health or designee; the secretary of the department of ecology or
designee; the secretary of the department of agriculture or designee; the superintendent
of public instruction or designee; the secretary of the department of social
and health services or designee; two licensed pediatric health care providers
with expertise in the field of children's environmental health, appointed by
the governor; one parent or guardian whose child has been clinically diagnosed
with exposure to an environmental health hazard, appointed by the governor; and
an expert in the field of environmental toxicology, appointed by the governor.

(3) Appointed members
shall serve four year terms. Of the initial legislative members, one shall be
appointed for a one-year term, one shall be appointed for a two-year term, one
shall be appointed for a three-year term, and one shall be appointed for a
four-year term. Of the initial members appointed by the governor, one shall be
appointed for a one-year term, one shall be appointed for a two-year term, one
shall be appointed for a three-year term, and one shall be appointed for a
four-year term.

(4) Members of the
advisory council shall serve without compensation.

(5) The department of
health shall provide staff support and administrative assistance to the
advisory council.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
3. The advisory council
shall:

(1) Meet at least four
times a year;

(2) Review and comment
on existing rules, regulations, and standards to ensure that they adequately
protect the health of children from environmental hazards;

(3) Gather and
disseminate information to the public, including the research and medical
communities, community-based organizations, schools, and state agencies, on how
to reduce, treat, and eliminate children's exposures to environmental hazards
and to further the public's understanding of the environmental hazards that may
potentially affect children; and

(4) Report to the
governor by December 1, 2002, and each December thereafter with recommendations
on changes in regulation that would reduce children's exposure to environmental
hazards.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 4. Sections 1 through 3 of
this act constitute a new chapter in Title 70 RCW.

---
END ---