BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF
WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1. RCW 48.48.140 and 1995 c
369 s 34 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) Smoke detection
devices shall be installed inside all dwelling units:

(a) Occupied by persons
other than the owner on and after December 31, 1981; or

(b) Built or
manufactured in this state after December 31, 1980.

(2) If the dwelling
unit is occupied by a hearing impaired person, at least one smoke detection
device for hearing impaired persons shall be installed or a portable smoke
detection device for hearing impaired persons shall be supplied and installed
on each level of the dwelling unit and in each bedroom of the dwelling unit
occupied by a hearing impaired person.

(3) The smoke
detection devices shall be designed, manufactured, and installed inside
dwelling units in conformance with:

(a) Nationally accepted
standards; and

(b) As provided by the
administrative procedure act, chapter 34.05 RCW, rules and regulations
promulgated by the chief of the Washington state patrol, through the director
of fire protection.

(((3))) (4)
Supply and installation of all smoke detection devices shall be the
responsibility of the owner. Maintenance of smoke detection devices, including
the replacement of batteries where required for the proper operation of the
smoke detection device, shall be the responsibility of the tenant, who shall
maintain the device as specified by the manufacturer. At the time of a
vacancy, the owner shall insure that the smoke detection device is operational
prior to the reoccupancy of the dwelling unit.

(((4))) (5)
Any owner or tenant failing to comply with this section shall be punished by a
fine of not more than two hundred dollars.

(((5))) (6)
For the purposes of this section:

(a) "Dwelling
unit" means a single unit providing complete, independent living
facilities for one or more persons including permanent provisions for living,
sleeping, eating, cooking, and sanitation; ((and))

(b) "Smoke
detection device" means an assembly incorporating in one unit a device
which detects visible or invisible particles of combustion, the control
equipment, and the alarm-sounding device, operated from a power supply either
in the unit or obtained at the point of installation; and

(c)
"Smoke detection device for hearing impaired persons" means an
approved smoke alarm that, when activated by smoke or products of combustion,
produces an audible and a visual warning. The visual warning shall produce a
light signal sufficient to warn a hearing impaired person of the presence of
fire or smoke.

--- END ---