BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF
WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec.
1. (1) The legislature finds
that:

(a) Arthritis
encompasses more than one hundred diseases and conditions that affect joints,
the surrounding tissues, and other connective tissues;

(b) One of the most
common chronic conditions in the United States, arthritis affects nearly one of
every six Americans, and will impact an estimated sixty million people by 2020;

(c) Arthritis is the
leading cause of disability in the United States, limiting daily activities for
more than seven million citizens;

(d) Although prevailing
myths inaccurately portray arthritis as an old person's disease, arthritis is a
multigenerational disease, affecting roughly one-quarter of a million children,
that has become one of the country's most pressing public health problems;

(e) This disease has a
significant impact on quality of life, not only for the individual who
experiences its painful symptoms and resulting disability, but also for family
members and caregivers;

(f) compounding this
picture are the enormous economic and social costs associated with treating
arthritis and its complications, which are estimated at almost eighty billion
dollars annually;

(g) Currently, the
challenge exists to ensure delivery of effective, but often underutilized,
interventions that are necessary in the prevention or reduction of arthritis-related
pain and disability;

(h) Although there
exists a large quantity of public information and programs about arthritis, it
remains inadequately disseminated and insufficient in addressing the needs of
specific diverse populations and other underserved groups;

(i) The arthritis
foundation, the United States centers for disease control and prevention, and
the association of state and territorial health officials have led the
development of a public health strategy, the national arthritis action plan, to
respond to this challenge; and

(j) Educating the
public and the health care community throughout the state about this
devastating disease is of paramount importance and is in every respect in the
public interest and to the benefit of all residents of the state of Washington.

(2) The purposes of
this chapter are:

(a) To create and
foster a statewide program that promotes public awareness and increases
knowledge about the causes of arthritis, the importance of early diagnosis and
appropriate management, effective prevention strategies, and pain prevention
and management;

(b) To develop
knowledge and enhance understanding of arthritis by disseminating educational
materials, information on research results, services provided, and strategies
for prevention and control to patients, health professionals, and the public;

(c) To establish a
solid scientific base of knowledge on the prevention of arthritis and related
disability through surveillance, epidemiology, and prevention research;

(d) To utilize educational
and training resources and services developed by organizations with appropriate
expertise and knowledge of arthritis and to use available technical assistance;

(e) To evaluate the
need for improving the quality and accessibility of existing community-based
arthritis services;

(f) To heighten
awareness about the prevention, detection, and treatment of arthritis among
state and local health and human services officials, health professionals and
providers, and policy makers;

(g) To implement and
coordinate state and local programs and services to reduce the public health
burden of arthritis;

(h) To adequately fund
these programs on a state level; and

(i) To provide lasting
improvements in the delivery of health care for individuals with arthritis and
their families, thus improving their quality of life while also containing
health care costs.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
2. (1) The department of
health must establish, promote, and maintain an arthritis prevention and
control program in order to raise public awareness, educate consumers, educate
and train health processionals, teachers, and human services providers, and for
other purposes.

(2) The department of
health must conduct a needs assessment to identify:

(a) Epidemiological and
other public health research being conducted within the state;

(b) Available technical
assistance and educational materials and programs nationwide and within the
state;

(c) The level of public
and professional arthritis awareness;

(d) The needs of people
with arthritis, their families, and caregivers;

(e) Educational and
support service needs of health care providers, including physicians, nurses,
managed care organizations, and other health care providers;

(f) The services
available to a person with arthritis;

(g) The existence of
arthritis treatment, self-management, physical activity, and other education
programs; and

(h) The existence of
rehabilitation services.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
3. The secretary of health
must:

(1) Provide sufficient
staff to implement the arthritis prevention and control program;

(2) Provide appropriate
training for staff of the arthritis prevention and control program;

(3) Identify the
appropriate organizations to carry out the program;

(4) Base the program on
the most current scientific information and findings;

(5) Work to increase
and improve community-based services available to people with arthritis and
their family members;

(6) Work with
governmental offices, national voluntary health organizations and their local
chapters, community and business leaders, community organizations, and health
care and human services providers to coordinate efforts and maximize state
resources in the areas of prevention, education, detection, pain management,
and treatment of arthritis; and

(7) Identify and, when
appropriate, use evidence-based arthritis programs and obtain related materials
and services from organizations with appropriate expertise and knowledge of
arthritis.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
4. (1) The department of
health must coordinate an advisory panel on arthritis that will provide
nongovernmental input regarding the arthritis prevention and control program
created in section 2 of this act. Membership includes, but is not limited to,
persons with arthritis, public health educators, medical experts on arthritis,
providers of arthritis health care, persons knowledgeable in health promotion
and education, and representatives of national arthritis organizations and
their local chapters.

(2) The department of
health must use, but is not limited to, strategies consistent with the national
arthritis action plan and existing state planning efforts to raise public
awareness and knowledge on the causes and nature of arthritis, personal risk
factors, the value of prevention and early detection, ways to minimize
preventable pain, and options for diagnosing and treating the disease.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
5. (1) The department of
health may replicate and use successful arthritis programs and enter into
either contracts or purchase materials or services, or both, from entities with
appropriate expertise for such services and materials as are necessary to carry
out the goals of the arthritis prevention and control program.

(2) The department of
health may enter into agreements with national organizations with expertise in
arthritis to implement parts of the arthritis prevention and control program.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
6. The secretary of health
may accept grants, services, and property from the federal government,
foundations, organizations, medical schools, and other entities as may be
available for the purposes of fulfilling the obligations of this chapter.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
7. The secretary of health
must seek any federal waiver or waivers that may be necessary to maximize funds
from the federal government to implement this chapter.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
8. This chapter may be known
and cited as the arthritis prevention and control act.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 9. Sections 1 through 8 of
this act constitute a new chapter in Title 70 RCW.

---
END ---