BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF
WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec.
1. A new section is added
to chapter 19.91 RCW to read as follows:

(1) A cigarette
retailer and manufacturer may enter into contracts or agreements with each
other for the retailer to: (a) Obtain, participate in, and receive payments
from the manufacturer under the manufacturer's cigarette merchandising,
advertising, display, or promotion programs, whether permanent or temporary;
(b) be compensated by the manufacturer for providing space for the
merchandising, advertising, display, or promotion of the manufacturer's
products; or (c) purchase cigarettes.

(2) The contract or
agreement under subsection (1) of this section shall not directly or
indirectly:

(a) Require the
retailer to allocate:

(i) A percentage or
fraction of all or any part of the retailer's: (A) Space available for product
display, signage, or advertising; or (B) cigarette category space, to a
manufacturer for any purpose; or

(ii) A determined
amount of such space, whether expressed in footage, product facings, or other
forms of stated measurement, to a manufacturer in order to receive, participate
in, or receive payment under a manufacturer's promotions; or

(b) Restrict or limit:

(i) A retailer's
cigarette category space; or

(ii) A retailer's
conduct of or participation in any program or activity concerning the sale,
display, merchandising, promotion, pricing, or advertising, in any manner, of
any manufacturer's products.

(3) The definitions in
this subsection apply throughout this section unless the context clearly
requires otherwise.

(a) "Cigarette
category space" means the portion of space in a store or on the premises
as reserved, made available, or identified by a retailer for the display of
products, signs, advertising, promotion, or other communications relating to
cigarettes.

(b)
"Manufacturer" means a cigarette manufacturer or importer, directly
or through its agent, representative, broker, or any other person or entity,
who directly or indirectly offers to supply, sell, or deliver cigarettes or
cigarette advertising, merchandising, or promotions to a cigarette retailer.

(c)
"Promotion" means any program or means by which: (i) The effective
price paid by a purchaser of cigarettes is reduced from the regular price
charged by the retailer when a manufacturer's promotion is not in effect or
applicable; or (ii) additional cigarettes or other items are offered to the
consumer in connection with the purchase of cigarettes.

(d)
"Retailer" has the same meaning as in RCW 82.24.010.

--- END ---