BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF
WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1. RCW 15.17.210 and 1998 c
154 s 14 are each amended to read as follows:

It is unlawful:

(1) To sell any fruits
or vegetables:

(a) As meeting the
standards for any fruit or vegetable as prescribed by the director unless they
in fact do so;

(b) For which no
standards have been established under this chapter unless ninety percent or
more by weight or count, as determined by the director, are free from plant
pest injury that has penetrated or damaged the edible portions and from worms,
mold, slime, or decay;

(c) In containers other
than the size and dimensions prescribed by the director by rule;

(d) Unless the
containers in which the fruits or vegetables are placed or packed are marked
with the proper grade and additional information as may be prescribed by rule.
The additional information may include:

(i) The name and
address of the grower, or packer, or distributor;

(ii) The varieties of
the fruits or vegetables;

(iii) The size, weight,
and either volume or count, or both, of the fruits or vegetables;

(e) Which are in
containers marked or advertised for sale or sold as being either graded or
classified, or both, according to the standards prescribed by the director by
rule unless the fruits or vegetables conform with the standards;

(f) Which are deceptively
packed;

(g) Which are
deceptively arranged or displayed;

(h) Which are
mislabeled; or

(i) Which do not
conform to this chapter or rules adopted under this chapter;

(2) For any person to
ship or transport or any carrier to accept any lot of fruits or vegetables
without an inspection certificate, permit, or certificate of compliance when
the director has prescribed by rule that such products be accompanied by an
inspection certificate, permit, or certificate of compliance. The inspection
certificate, permit, or certificate of compliance shall be on a form prescribed
by the director and may include methods of denoting that all assessments
provided for by law have been paid before the fruits or vegetables may lawfully
be delivered or accepted for shipment;

(3) For any person to
refuse to submit any container, load, or display of fruits or vegetables for
inspection by the director, or refuse to stop any vehicle or equipment
containing such products for the purpose of inspection by the director; ((or))

(4) For any person to
move any fruits or vegetables or their containers to which any tag has been
affixed, except as provided in RCW 15.17.200; or

(5)
After October 1st of any calendar year, for any person to sell containers of
apples, containing apples harvested in a prior calendar year, to any retailer
or wholesaler for the purpose of resale to the public for fresh consumption.

--- END ---