BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF
WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec.
1. The legislature finds
that voter trust in government is vital to the representative form of
government and that governing bodies must govern in a manner that enhances that
public trust. The legislature further finds that failure to deliver on
activities pledged to the voters seriously erodes public confidence in our
institutions and that this trust can best be regained by ensuring that future
actions by public bodies will meet public expectations.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
2. A new section is added
to chapter 81.112 RCW to read as follows:

(1) A regional transit
authority that by January 1, 2002, has been authorized to impose taxes to
support implementation of a plan within its service area is governed by this
section.

(2) The authority shall
prepare a report that will address, but not be limited to: Project delivery
schedules and service implementation outlined in the plan approved by voters;
projected future revenue and expenditures over the life of the plan; the budget
forecast over the life of the plan; and project delivery and service start-up
dates.

(3) The authority shall
submit its report to the governor, the transportation committees of the state
legislature, and the county councils for each county in which the authority is
located. After receipt of the plan, the legislative transportation committee
shall as quickly as practicable evaluate the report for content and accuracy
and hold at least one public hearing on the report. After evaluating the
report and conducting the public hearing or hearings, the committee shall make
a finding as to whether the report and projected project and service delivery
schedule and financial plan is attainable. A resolution adopted by the
committee finding that the report is acceptable and accurate constitutes
acceptance of the report.

(4) Until the report is
accepted by the legislative transportation committee, a regional transit
authority shall immediately cease and desist from entering into new contracts
for purchase of right of way or construction of facilities for any light rail
system development that is part of the plan adopted by the voters.

Sec. 3. RCW 81.112.070 and 1992
c 101 s 7 are each amended to read as follows:

Subject to the
limitations of section 2 of this act, in addition to the powers
specifically granted by this chapter an authority shall have all powers
necessary to implement a high capacity transportation system and to develop
revenues for system support. An authority may contract with the United States
or any agency thereof, any state or agency thereof, any public transportation
benefit area, any county, county transportation authority, city, metropolitan
municipal corporation, special district, or governmental agency, within or
without the state, and any private person, firm, or corporation for: (1) The
purpose of receiving gifts or grants or securing loans or advances for
preliminary planning and feasibility studies; (2) the design, construction, or
operation of high capacity transportation system facilities; or (3) the
provision or receipt of services, facilities, or property rights to provide
revenues for the system. An authority shall have the power to contract
pursuant to RCW 39.33.050. In addition, an authority may contract with any
governmental agency or with any private person, firm, or corporation for the
use by either contracting party of all or any part of the facilities,
structures, lands, interests in lands, air rights over lands and rights of way
of all kinds which are owned, leased, or held by the other party and for the
purpose of planning, constructing, or operating any facility or performing any
service that the authority may be authorized to operate or perform, on such
terms as may be agreed upon by the contracting parties. Before any contract
for the lease or operation of any authority facilities is let to any private
person, firm, or corporation, a general schedule of rental rates for equipment
with or without operators applicable to all private certificated carriers shall
be publicly posted, and for other facilities competitive bids shall first be
called upon such notice, bidder qualifications, and bid conditions as the board
shall determine. This shall allow use of negotiated procurements.

Sec. 4. RCW 81.112.080 and 1992
c 101 s 8 are each amended to read as follows:

Subject to the
limitations of section 2 of this act, an authority shall have the following
powers in addition to the general powers granted by this chapter:

(1) To carry out the
planning processes set forth in RCW 81.104.100;

(2) To acquire by
purchase, condemnation, gift, or grant and to lease, construct, add to,
improve, replace, repair, maintain, operate, and regulate the use of high
capacity transportation facilities and properties within authority boundaries
including surface, underground, or overhead railways, tramways, busways, buses,
bus sets, entrained and linked buses, ferries, or other means of local
transportation except taxis, and including escalators, moving sidewalks,
personal rapid transit systems or other people-moving systems, passenger
terminal and parking facilities and properties, and such other facilities and
properties as may be necessary for passenger, vehicular, and vessel access to
and from such people-moving systems, terminal and parking facilities and
properties, together with all lands, rights of way, property, equipment, and
accessories necessary for such high capacity transportation systems. When
developing specifications for high capacity transportation system operating
equipment, an authority shall take into account efforts to establish or sustain
a domestic manufacturing capacity for such equipment. The right of eminent
domain shall be exercised by an authority in the same manner and by the same
procedure as or may be provided by law for cities of the first class, except
insofar as such laws may be inconsistent with the provisions of this chapter.
Public transportation facilities and properties which are owned by any city,
county, county transportation authority, public transportation benefit area, or
metropolitan municipal corporation may be acquired or used by an authority only
with the consent of the agency owning such facilities. Such agencies are
hereby authorized to convey or lease such facilities to an authority or to
contract for their joint use on such terms as may be fixed by agreement between
the agency and the authority.

The facilities and
properties of an authority whose vehicles will operate primarily within the
rights of way of public streets, roads, or highways, may be acquired,
developed, and operated without the corridor and design hearings that are
required by RCW 35.58.273 for mass transit facilities operating on a separate
right of way;

(3) To dispose of any
real or personal property acquired in connection with any authority function
and that is no longer required for the purposes of the authority, in the same
manner as provided for cities of the first class. When an authority determines
that a facility or any part thereof that has been acquired from any public
agency without compensation is no longer required for authority purposes, but
is required by the agency from which it was acquired, the authority shall by
resolution transfer it to such agency;

(4) To fix rates, tolls,
fares, and charges for the use of such facilities and to establish various
routes and classes of service. Fares or charges may be adjusted or eliminated
for any distinguishable class of users.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 5. This act is necessary for
the immediate preservation of the public peace, health, or safety, or support
of the state government and its existing public institutions, and takes effect
immediately.

---
END ---