BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF
WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec.
1. A new section is added
to chapter 41.26 RCW under the subchapter heading "plan 2" to read as
follows:

(1) An employee who is
eligible for membership and was a member of the public employees' retirement
system while employed providing emergency medical services for a city, town,
county, or district and whose job was relocated from another department of a
city, town, county, or district to a fire department has the following options:

(a) Remain a member of
the public employees' retirement system; or

(b) Leave any service
credit earned as a member of the public employees' retirement system in the
public employees' retirement system, and have all future service earned in the
law enforcement officers' and fire fighters' retirement system plan 2, becoming
a dual member under the provisions of chapter 41.54 RCW; or

(c) Make an election,
filed in writing with the department of retirement systems, to transfer service
credit previously earned as an emergency medical technician for a city, town,
county, or district in the public employees' retirement system plan 2 to the
law enforcement officers' and fire fighters' retirement system plan 2 as
defined in RCW 41.26.030.

(2)(a) A member who
elects to transfer service credit under subsection (1)(c) of this section shall
make the payments required by this subsection prior to having service credit
earned as an emergency medical technician for a city, town, county, or district
under the public employees' retirement system plan 2 transferred to the law
enforcement officers' and fire fighters' retirement system plan 2.

(b) A member who elects
to transfer service credit under this subsection shall pay, for the applicable
period of service, the difference between the contributions the employee paid
to the public employees' retirement system plan 2 and the contributions that
would have been paid by the employee had the employee been a member of the law
enforcement officers' and fire fighters' retirement system plan 2, plus
interest on this difference as determined by the director. This payment must
be made no later than five years from the effective date of the election made
under subsection (1)(b) of this section or the date of retirement, whichever
comes first.

(c) For the applicable
period of service, the employer shall pay an amount sufficient to ensure that
the contribution level to the law enforcement officers' and fire fighters'
retirement system will not increase due to this transfer. This payment must be
made within five years of the completion of the employee payment in (b) of this
subsection.

(d) Upon completion of
the payment required in (b) of this subsection, the department shall transfer
from the public employees' retirement system plan 2 to the law enforcement
officers' and fire fighters' retirement system plan 2: (i) All of the
employee's applicable accumulated contributions plus interest and an equal
amount of employer contributions; and (ii) all applicable months of service, as
defined in RCW 41.26.030(14)(b), credited to the employee under this chapter
for service as an emergency services provider for a city, town, county, or
district as though that service was rendered as a member of the law enforcement
officers' and fire fighters' retirement system plan 2.

(e) Upon transfer of
service credit, contributions, and interest under this subsection, the employee
is permanently excluded from membership in the public employees' retirement
system plan 2 for all service transfers.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 2. This act expires July 1,
2007.

---
END ---