BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF
WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1. RCW 84.34.100 and 1980 c
134 s 4 are each amended to read as follows:

The additional tax,
penalties, and/or interest provided by RCW 84.34.070 and 84.34.080 shall be
payable in full thirty days after the date which the treasurer's statement
therefor is rendered. Such additional tax when collected shall be distributed
by the county treasurer in the same manner in which current taxes applicable to
the subject land are distributed. Additional tax, penalties, or interest
received by a county or city must be used for park maintenance, upkeep, or
acquisition. Additional tax, penalties, or interest received by the state must
be used for park maintenance and upkeep.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
2. A new section is added
to chapter 84.33 RCW to read as follows:

The
additional tax, penalties, or interest under this chapter shall be distributed
by the county treasurer in the same manner in which current taxes applicable to
the subject land are distributed. Additional tax, penalties, or interest
received under this chapter by a county or city must be used for park
maintenance, upkeep, or acquisition. Additional tax, penalties, or interest
received under this chapter by the state must be used for park maintenance and
upkeep.

---
END ---