BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF
WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1. RCW 50.22.140 and 2000
2nd sp.s. c 1 s 916 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) The
employment security department is authorized to pay training benefits under RCW
50.22.150, but may not obligate expenditures beyond the limits specified in
this section or as otherwise set by the legislature. For the fiscal year
ending June 30, 2000, the commissioner may not obligate more than twenty
million dollars for training benefits. For the two fiscal years ending June
30, 2002, the commissioner may not obligate more than sixty million dollars for
training benefits. Any funds not obligated in one fiscal year may be carried
forward to the next fiscal year. For each fiscal year beginning after June 30,
2002, the commissioner may not obligate more than twenty million dollars
annually in addition to any funds carried ((over)) forward from
previous fiscal years. The department shall develop a process to ensure that
expenditures do not exceed available funds and to prioritize access to funds
when again available.

(2) After June 30,
2002, in addition to the amounts that may be obligated under subsection (1) of
this section, the commissioner may obligate up to thirty-four million dollars
for training benefits under RCW 50.22.150 for individuals in the aerospace industry
assigned the standard industrial classification code "372" or the
North American industry classification system code "336411" whose
claims are filed before January 5, 2003. The funds provided in this subsection
must be fully obligated for training benefits for these individuals before the
funds provided in subsection (1) of this section may be obligated for training
benefits for these individuals. Any amount of the funds specified in this
subsection that is not obligated as permitted may not be carried forward to any
future period.

Sec. 2. RCW 50.22.150 and 2000 c
2 s 8 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) Subject to
availability of funds, training benefits are available for an individual who is
eligible for or has exhausted entitlement to unemployment compensation benefits
and who:

(a) Is a dislocated
worker as defined in RCW 50.04.075;

(b) Except as provided
under subsection (2) of this section, has demonstrated, through a work history,
sufficient tenure in an occupation or in work with a particular skill set.
This screening will take place during the assessment process;

(c) Is, after
assessment of demand for the individual's occupation or skills in the
individual's labor market, determined to need job-related training to find
suitable employment in his or her labor market. Beginning July 1, 2001, the
assessment of demand for the individual's occupation or skill sets must be
substantially based on declining occupation or skill sets identified in local
labor market areas by the local work force development councils, in cooperation
with the employment security department and its labor market information
division, under subsection (((9))) (10) of this section;

(d) Develops an
individual training program that is submitted to the commissioner for approval
within sixty days after the individual is notified by the employment security
department of the requirements of this section;

(e) Enters the approved
training program by ninety days after the date of the notification, unless the
employment security department determines that the training is not available
during the ninety-day period, in which case the individual enters training as
soon as it is available; and

(f) Is enrolled in
training approved under this section on a full-time basis as determined by the
educational institution, and is making satisfactory progress in the training as
certified by the educational institution.

(2) Until June 30,
2002, the following individuals who meet the requirements of subsection (1) of
this section may, without regard to the tenure requirements under subsection
(1)(b) of this section, receive training benefits as provided in this section:

(a) An exhaustee who
has base year employment in the aerospace industry assigned the standard industrial
classification code "372" or the North American industry
classification system code "336411";

(b) An exhaustee who
has base year employment in the forest products industry, determined by the
department, but including the industries assigned the major group standard
industrial classification codes "24" and "26" or any
equivalent codes in the North American industry classification system code, and
the industries involved in the harvesting and management of logs,
transportation of logs and wood products, processing of wood products, and the
manufacturing and distribution of wood processing and logging equipment; or

(c) An exhaustee who
has base year employment in the fishing industry assigned the standard
industrial classification code "0912" or any equivalent codes in the
North American industry classification system code.

(3) An individual is
not eligible for training benefits under this section if he or she:

(a) Is a standby
claimant who expects recall to his or her regular employer;

(b) Has a definite
recall date that is within six months of the date he or she is laid off; or

(c) Is unemployed due
to a regular seasonal layoff which demonstrates a pattern of unemployment
consistent with the provisions of RCW 50.20.015. Regular seasonal layoff does
not include layoff due to permanent structural downsizing or structural changes
in the individual's labor market.

(4) The definitions in
this subsection apply throughout this section unless the context clearly
requires otherwise.

(a) "Educational
institution" means an institution of higher education as defined in RCW
28B.10.016 or an educational institution as defined in RCW 28C.04.410,
including equivalent educational institutions in other states.

(b) "Sufficient
tenure" means earning a plurality of wages in a particular occupation or
using a particular skill set during the base year and at least two of the four
twelve-month periods immediately preceding the base year.

(c) "Training
benefits" means additional benefits paid under this section.

(d) "Training
program" means:

(i) An education
program determined to be necessary as a prerequisite to vocational training
after counseling at the educational institution in which the individual enrolls
under his or her approved training program; or

(ii) A vocational
training program at an educational institution:

(A) That is targeted to
training for a high demand occupation. Beginning July 1, 2001, the assessment
of high demand occupations authorized for training under this section must be
substantially based on labor market and employment information developed by
local work force development councils, in cooperation with the employment
security department and its labor market information division, under subsection
(((9))) (10) of this section;

(B) That is likely to
enhance the individual's marketable skills and earning power; and

(C) That meets the
criteria for performance developed by the work force training and education
coordinating board for the purpose of determining those training programs eligible
for funding under Title I of P.L. 105-220.

"Training
program" does not include any course of education primarily intended to
meet the requirements of a baccalaureate or higher degree, unless the training
meets specific requirements for certification, licensing, or for specific
skills necessary for the occupation.

(5) Benefits shall be
paid as follows:

(a)(i) Except as
provided in (a)(iii) of this subsection, for exhaustees who are eligible
under subsection (1) of this section, the total training benefit amount shall
be fifty-two times the individual's weekly benefit amount, reduced by the total
amount of regular benefits and extended benefits paid, or deemed paid, with
respect to the benefit year; or

(ii) For exhaustees who
are eligible under subsection (2) of this section, for claims filed before
June 30, 2002, the total training benefit amount shall be seventy-four
times the individual's weekly benefit amount, reduced by the total amount of
regular benefits and extended benefits paid, or deemed paid, with respect to
the benefit year. ((Beginning with new claims filed after June 30, 2002,
for exhaustees eligible under subsection (2) of this section, the total
training benefit amount shall be fifty-two times the individual's weekly
benefit amount, reduced by the total amount of regular benefits and extended
benefits paid, or deemed paid, with respect to the benefit year)); or

(iii) For exhaustees
eligible under subsection (1) of this section from industries listed under
subsection (2)(a) of this section, for claims filed on or after June 30, 2002,
but before January 5, 2003, the total training benefit amount shall be
seventy-four times the individual's weekly benefit amount, reduced by the total
amount of regular benefits and extended benefits paid, or deemed paid, with
respect to the benefit year.

(b) The weekly benefit
amount shall be the same as the regular weekly amount payable during the
applicable benefit year and shall be paid under the same terms and conditions
as regular benefits. The training benefits shall be paid before any extended
benefits but not before any similar federally funded program.

(c) Training benefits
are not payable for weeks more than two years beyond the end of the benefit
year of the regular claim.

(6) The requirement under
RCW 50.22.010(10) relating to exhausting regular benefits does not apply to an
individual otherwise eligible for training benefits under this section when the
individual's benefit year ends before his or her training benefits are
exhausted and the individual is eligible for a new benefit year. These
individuals will have the option of remaining on the original claim or filing a
new claim.

(7)(a) Except as
provided in (b) of this subsection, individuals who receive training
benefits under this section or under any previous additional benefits program
for training are not eligible for training benefits under this section for five
years from the last receipt of training benefits under this section or under
any previous additional benefits program for training.

(b) With respect to
claims that are filed before January 5, 2003, an individual in the aerospace
industry assigned the standard industrial code "372" or the North
American industry classification system code "336411" who received
training benefits under this section, and who had been making satisfactory
progress in a training program but did not complete the program, is eligible,
without regard to the five-year limitation of this section and without regard
to the requirement of subsection (1)(b) of this section, if applicable, to
receive training benefits under this section in order to complete that training
program. The total training benefit amount that applies to the individual is
seventy-four times the individual's weekly benefit amount, reduced by the total
amount of regular benefits paid, or deemed paid, with respect to the benefit
year in which the training program resumed and, if applicable, reduced by the
amount of training benefits paid, or deemed paid, with respect to the benefit
year in which the training program commenced.

(8) An individual
eligible to receive a trade readjustment allowance under chapter 2 of Title II
of the Trade Act of 1974, as amended, shall not be eligible to receive benefits
under this section for each week the individual receives such trade
readjustment allowance. An individual eligible to receive emergency
unemployment compensation, so called, under any federal law, shall not be
eligible to receive benefits under this section for each week the individual
receives such compensation.

(9) All base
year employers are interested parties to the approval of training and the
granting of training benefits.

(((9))) (10)
By July 1, 2001, each local work force development council, in cooperation with
the employment security department and its labor market information division,
must identify occupations and skill sets that are declining and occupations and
skill sets that are in high demand. For the purposes of RCW 50.22.130 through
50.22.150 and section 9, chapter 2, Laws of 2000, "high demand" means
demand for employment that exceeds the supply of qualified workers for
occupations or skill sets in a labor market area. Local work force development
councils must use state and locally developed labor market information. Thereafter,
each local work force development council shall update this information
annually or more frequently if needed.

(((10))) (11)
The commissioner shall adopt rules as necessary to implement this section.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
3. A new section is added
to chapter 50.20 RCW to read as follows:

(1) From July 1, 2002,
to June 30, 2004, the maximum amount payable weekly shall be four hundred
ninety-six dollars.

(2) From July 1, 2004,
to June 30, 2010, the maximum amount payable weekly shall be seventy percent of
the "average weekly wage" for the calendar year preceding such June
30th, except that the maximum amount payable weekly shall not increase by more
than four percent each year. If growth in the average annual wage causes growth
in the maximum amount payable weekly that exceeds four percent, then fifty
percent of the growth rate that exceeds four percent shall be added to the
maximum amount payable weekly in any of the subsequent three years. For years
in which the potential recaptured growth rate exceeds the growth rate needed to
reach four percent, the excess recaptured growth rate is available to be added
to the maximum amount payable weekly in the remaining years in the three-year
period. Each year, the department shall add any excess recaptured growth rate
to the maximum amount payable weekly. Remaining portions of the excess
additional growth rate not applied within the three-year period shall lapse.
The sum of the growth rate and the excess additional growth rate shall not
exceed four percent.

(3) If the maximum
amount payable weekly is less than seventy percent of the average weekly wage on
June 30, 2010, it shall be restored to seventy percent of the average weekly
wage using one of the following methods. The maximum amount payable weekly may
be restored: (a) In equal increments in the four fiscal years ending on June
30, 2014; or (b) in increments which, together with the growth rate in the
maximum amount payable weekly, do not exceed nine percent in each fiscal year.
The applicable method is the method that restores the maximum amount payable
weekly to seventy percent of the average weekly wage first.

Sec. 4. RCW 50.20.120 and 1993 c
483 s 12 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) Subject to the
other provisions of this title, benefits shall be payable to any eligible
individual during the individual's benefit year in a maximum amount equal to
the lesser of thirty times the weekly benefit amount (determined hereinafter)
or one-third of the individual's base year wages under this title: PROVIDED, That
as to any week beginning on and after March 31, 1981, which falls in an
extended benefit period as defined in RCW 50.22.010(1), as now or hereafter
amended, an individual's eligibility for maximum benefits in excess of
twenty-six times his or her weekly benefit amount will be subject to the terms
and conditions set forth in RCW 50.22.020, as now or hereafter amended.

(2) An individual's
weekly benefit amount shall be an amount equal to one twenty-fifth of the
average quarterly wages of the individual's total wages during the two quarters
of the individual's base year in which such total wages were highest. The
maximum and minimum amounts payable weekly shall be determined as of each June
30th to apply to benefit years beginning in the twelve-month period immediately
following such June 30th. Except as provided in section 3 of this act, the
maximum amount payable weekly shall be seventy percent of the "average
weekly wage" for the calendar year preceding such June 30th. The minimum
amount payable weekly shall be fifteen percent of the "average weekly
wage" for the calendar year preceding such June 30th. If any weekly
benefit, maximum benefit, or minimum benefit amount computed herein is not a
multiple of one dollar, it shall be reduced to the next lower multiple of one
dollar.

Sec. 5. RCW 50.24.010 and 2000 c
2 s 2 are each amended to read as follows:

(1)
Contributions shall accrue and become payable by each employer (except
employers as described in RCW 50.44.010 who have properly elected to make
payments in lieu of contributions and those employers who are required to make
payments in lieu of contributions) for each calendar year in which the employer
is subject to this title at the rate established pursuant to chapter 50.29 RCW.

(2) In each rate
year, the amount of wages subject to tax for each individual shall be one
hundred fifteen percent of the amount of wages subject to tax for the previous
year rounded to the next lower one hundred dollars, except that:

(a) For employers
assigned under RCW 50.29.025 to rate class 1 through 18, the amount of
wages subject to tax in any rate year shall not exceed eighty percent of the
"average annual wage for contributions purposes" for the second
preceding calendar year rounded to the next lower one hundred dollars. ((However,
the amount subject to tax shall be twenty-four thousand three hundred dollars
for rate year 2000.))

(b) For employers
assigned under RCW 50.29.025 to rate class 19 through 20E, and contribution
paying employers not qualified to be in the array under RCW 50.29.025(6), the
amount of wages subject to tax:

(i) For rate year
2003, shall not exceed eighty-five percent of the "average annual wage for
contributions purposes" for the second preceding calendar year rounded to
the next lower one hundred dollars.

(ii) For rate year
2004 and thereafter, shall not exceed ninety percent of the "average
annual wage for contributions purposes" for the second preceding calendar
year rounded to the next lower one hundred dollars.

(3) In making
computations under this section and RCW 50.29.010, wages paid based on services
for employers making payments in lieu of contributions shall not be considered
remuneration. Moneys paid from the fund, based on services performed for employers
who make payments in lieu of contributions, which have not been reimbursed to
the fund as of any June 30 shall be deemed an asset of the unemployment
compensation fund, to the extent that such moneys exceed the amount of payments
in lieu of contributions which the commissioner has previously determined to be
uncollectible: PROVIDED, FURTHER, That the amount attributable to employment
with the state shall also include interest as provided for in RCW 50.44.020.

(4)(a)
Contributions shall become due and be paid by each employer to the treasurer
for the unemployment compensation fund in accordance with such regulations as
the commissioner may prescribe, and shall not be deducted, in whole or in part,
from the remuneration of individuals in employment of the employer. Any
deduction in violation of the provisions of this section shall be unlawful.

(b) In the
payment of any contributions, a fractional part of a cent shall be disregarded
unless it amounts to one-half cent or more, in which case it shall be increased
to one cent.

Sec. 6. RCW 50.29.020 and 2000 c
2 s 3 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) An experience
rating account shall be established and maintained for each employer, except
employers as described in RCW 50.44.010 and 50.44.030 who have properly elected
to make payments in lieu of contributions, taxable local government employers
as described in RCW 50.44.035, and those employers who are required to make
payments in lieu of contributions, based on existing records of the employment
security department. Benefits paid to any eligible individuals shall be
charged to the experience rating accounts of each of such individual's
employers during the individual's base year in the same ratio that the wages
paid by each employer to the individual during the base year bear to the wages
paid by all employers to that individual during that base year, except as
otherwise provided in this section.

(2) The legislature
finds that certain benefit payments, in whole or in part, should not be charged
to the experience rating accounts of employers except those employers described
in RCW 50.44.010 and 50.44.030 who have properly elected to make payments in
lieu of contributions, taxable local government employers described in RCW
50.44.035, and those employers who are required to make payments in lieu of
contributions, as follows:

(a) Benefits paid to
any individuals later determined to be ineligible shall not be charged to the
experience rating account of any contribution paying employer.

(b) Benefits paid to an
individual filing under the provisions of chapter 50.06 RCW shall not be
charged to the experience rating account of any contribution paying employer
only if:

(i) The individual
files under RCW 50.06.020(1) after receiving crime victims' compensation for a
disability resulting from a nonwork-related occurrence; or

(ii) The individual
files under RCW 50.06.020(2).

(c) Benefits paid which
represent the state's share of benefits payable as extended benefits defined
under RCW 50.22.010(6) shall not be charged to the experience rating account of
any contribution paying employer.

(d) In the case of
individuals who requalify for benefits under RCW 50.20.050 or 50.20.060,
benefits based on wage credits earned prior to the disqualifying separation
shall not be charged to the experience rating account of the contribution
paying employer from whom that separation took place.

(e) In the case of
individuals identified under RCW 50.20.015, benefits paid with respect to a
calendar quarter, which exceed the total amount of wages earned in the state of
Washington in the higher of two corresponding calendar quarters included within
the individual's determination period, as defined in RCW 50.20.015, shall not
be charged to the experience rating account of any contribution paying
employer.

(((f) Benefits paid
under RCW 50.22.150 shall not be charged to the experience rating account of
any contribution paying employer.))

(3)(a) A
contribution-paying base year employer, not otherwise eligible for relief of
charges for benefits under this section, may receive such relief if the benefit
charges result from payment to an individual who:

(i) Last left the
employ of such employer voluntarily for reasons not attributable to the
employer;

(ii) Was discharged for
misconduct connected with his or her work not a result of inability to meet the
minimum job requirements;

(iii) Is unemployed as
a result of closure or severe curtailment of operation at the employer's plant,
building, work site, or other facility. This closure must be for reasons
directly attributable to a catastrophic occurrence such as fire, flood, or
other natural disaster; or

(iv) Continues to be
employed on a regularly scheduled permanent part-time basis by a base year
employer and who at some time during the base year was concurrently employed
and subsequently separated from at least one other base year employer. Benefit
charge relief ceases when the employment relationship between the employer
requesting relief and the claimant is terminated. This subsection does not
apply to shared work employers under chapter 50.60 RCW.

(b) The employer
requesting relief of charges under this subsection must request relief in
writing within thirty days following mailing to the last known address of the
notification of the valid initial determination of such claim, stating the date
and reason for the separation or the circumstances of continued employment.
The commissioner, upon investigation of the request, shall determine whether
relief should be granted.

Sec. 7. RCW 50.29.025 and 2000 c
2 s 4 are each amended to read as follows:

The contribution rate
for each employer subject to contributions under RCW 50.24.010 shall be
determined under this section.

(1) A fund balance
ratio shall be determined by dividing the balance in the unemployment
compensation fund as of the September 30th immediately preceding the rate year
by the total remuneration paid by all employers subject to contributions during
the second calendar year preceding the rate year and reported to the department
by the following March 31st. The division shall be carried to the fourth
decimal place with the remaining fraction, if any, disregarded. The fund
balance ratio shall be expressed as a percentage.

(2) The interval of the
fund balance ratio, expressed as a percentage, shall determine which tax
schedule in subsection (5) of this section shall be in effect for assigning tax
rates for the rate year, except that during rate year 2004 tax schedule C
shall be in effect unless a lower tax schedule is determined to be in effect by
the interval of the fund balance ratio. The intervals for determining the
effective tax schedule shall be:

Interval
of the

Fund
Balance Ratio Effective

Expressed
as a Percentage Tax Schedule

2.90
and above AA

2.10 to 2.89 A

1.70 to 2.09 B

1.40 to 1.69 C

1.00
to 1.39 D

0.70
to 0.99 E

Less than 0.70 F

(3) An array shall be
prepared, listing all qualified employers in ascending order of their benefit
ratios. The array shall show for each qualified employer: (a) Identification
number; (b) benefit ratio; (c) taxable payrolls for the four calendar quarters
immediately preceding the computation date and reported to the department by
the cut-off date; (d) a cumulative total of taxable payrolls consisting of the
employer's taxable payroll plus the taxable payrolls of all other employers
preceding him or her in the array; and (e) the percentage equivalent of the
cumulative total of taxable payrolls.

(4) Each employer in
the array shall be assigned to one of twenty rate classes according to the
percentage intervals of cumulative taxable payrolls set forth in subsection (5)
of this section: PROVIDED, That if an employer's taxable payroll falls within
two or more rate classes, the employer and any other employer with the same
benefit ratio shall be assigned to the lowest rate class which includes any
portion of the employer's taxable payroll.

(5)(a) Except as
provided in RCW 50.29.026 and sections 9 and 10 of this act, the
contribution rate for each employer in the array shall be the rate specified in
the following tables for the rate class to which he or she has been assigned,
as determined under subsection (4) of this section, within the tax schedule
which is to be in effect during the rate year:

((Percent of

Cumulative Schedules of Contributions
Rates

Taxable Payrolls for Effective Tax Schedule

Rate

From To Class AA A B C D E F

0.00 5.00 1 0.47 0.47 0.57 0.97 1.47 1.87 2.47

5.01 10.00 2 0.47 0.47 0.77 1.17 1.67 2.07 2.67

10.01 15.00 3 0.57 0.57 0.97 1.37 1.77 2.27 2.87

15.01 20.00 4 0.57 0.73 1.11 1.51 1.90 2.40 2.98

20.01 25.00 5 0.72 0.92 1.30 1.70 2.09 2.59 3.08

25.01 30.00 6 0.91 1.11 1.49 1.89 2.29 2.69 3.18

30.01 35.00 7 1.00 1.29 1.69 2.08 2.48 2.88 3.27

35.01 40.00 8 1.19 1.48 1.88 2.27 2.67 3.07 3.47

40.01 45.00 9 1.37 1.67 2.07 2.47 2.87 3.27 3.66

45.01 50.00 10 1.56 1.86 2.26 2.66 3.06 3.46 3.86

50.01 55.00 11 1.84 2.14 2.45 2.85 3.25 3.66 3.95

55.01 60.00 12 2.03 2.33 2.64 3.04 3.44 3.85 4.15

60.01 65.00 13 2.22 2.52 2.83 3.23 3.64 4.04 4.34

65.01 70.00 14 2.40 2.71 3.02 3.43 3.83 4.24 4.54

70.01 75.00 15 2.68 2.90 3.21 3.62 4.02 4.43 4.63

75.01 80.00 16 2.87 3.09 3.69 3.81 4.22 4.53 4.73

80.01 85.00 17 3.27 3.47 3.77 4.17 4.57 4.87 4.97

85.01 90.00 18 3.67 3.87 4.17 4.57 4.87 4.97 5.17

90.01 95.00 19 4.07 4.27 4.57 4.97 5.07 5.17 5.37

95.01 100.00 20 5.40 5.40 5.40 5.40 5.40 5.40 5.40))

Percent of

Cumulative Schedules of
Contributions Rates

Taxable Payrolls for Effective Tax
Schedule

Rate

From To Class AA A B C D E F

0.00 5.00 1 0.47 0.47 0.62 1.02 1.47 1.87 2.47

5.01 10.00 2 0.47 0.47 0.82 1.22 1.67 2.07 2.67

10.01 15.00 3 0.57 0.57 1.02 1.42 1.77 2.27 2.87

15.01 20.00 4 0.57 0.73 1.16 1.56 1.90 2.40 2.98

20.01 25.00 5 0.72 0.92 1.30 1.70 2.09 2.59 3.08

25.01 30.00 6 0.91 1.11 1.49 1.89 2.29 2.69 3.18

30.01 35.00 7 1.00 1.29 1.69 2.08 2.48 2.88 3.27

35.01 40.00 8 1.19 1.48 1.88 2.27 2.67 3.07 3.47

40.01 45.00 9 1.37 1.67 2.07 2.47 2.87 3.27 3.66

45.01 50.00 10 1.56 1.86 2.26 2.66 3.06 3.46 3.86

50.01 55.00 11 1.84 2.14 2.45 2.85 3.25 3.66 3.95

55.01 60.00 12 2.03 2.33 2.64 3.04 3.44 3.85 4.15

60.01 65.00 13 2.22 2.52 2.83 3.23 3.64 4.04 4.34

65.01 70.00 14 2.40 2.71 3.02 3.43 3.83 4.24 4.54

70.01 75.00 15 2.68 2.90 3.21 3.62 4.02 4.43 4.63

75.01 80.00 16 2.87 3.09 3.42 3.81 4.22 4.53 4.73

80.01 85.00 17 3.27 3.47 3.77 4.17 4.57 4.87 4.97

85.01 90.00 18 3.67 3.87 4.17 4.57 4.87 4.97 5.17

90.01 95.00 19 4.10 4.30 4.60 5.00 5.10 5.20 5.40

95.01 100.00 20

20A 5.40 5.40 5.40 5.40 5.40 5.55 5.60

20B 5.40 5.45 5.50 5.55 5.60 5.65 5.70

20C 5.50 5.55 5.60 5.65 5.70 5.75 5.80

20D 5.60 5.65 5.70 5.75 5.80 5.85 5.90

20E 5.70 5.75 5.80 5.85 5.90 5.95 6.00

(b) Employers
assigned to rate class 20 shall be assigned to one of the rate classes 20A
through E as follows:

(i) Employers with a
benefit ratio of less than 0.054000 shall be assigned to rate class 20A;

(ii) Employers with
a benefit ratio of at least 0.054000 but less than 0.063000 shall be assigned
to rate class 20B;

(iii) Employers with
a benefit ratio of at least 0.063000 but less than 0.068000 shall be assigned
to rate class 20C;

(iv) Employers with
a benefit ratio of at least 0.068000 but less than 0.075000 shall be assigned
to rate class 20D; and

(v) Employers with a
benefit ratio of 0.075000 or higher shall be assigned to rate class 20E.

(c) The maximum
contribution rate for employers whose standard industrial classification code
is within major group "01," "02," or "07," or is
code "5148," or the equivalent code in the North American industry
classification system code, may not exceed the rate in rate class 20A for the
applicable rate year.

(6) Except as
provided in sections 9 and 10 of this act, the contribution rate for each
employer not qualified to be in the array shall be as follows:

(a) Employers who do
not meet the definition of "qualified employer" by reason of failure
to pay contributions when due shall be assigned a contribution rate two-tenths
higher than that in rate class 20E for the applicable rate year, except
employers who have an approved agency-deferred payment contract by September 30
of the previous rate year. If any employer with an approved agency-deferred
payment contract fails to make any one of the succeeding deferred payments or
fails to submit any succeeding tax report and payment in a timely manner, the
employer's tax rate shall immediately revert to a contribution rate two-tenths
higher than that in rate class 20E for the applicable rate year; and

(b) For all other
employers not qualified to be in the array, the contribution rate shall be a
rate equal to the average industry rate as determined by the commissioner;
however, the rate may not be less than one percent. Assignment of employers by
the commissioner to industrial classification, for purposes of this section,
shall be in accordance with established classification practices found in the
"Standard Industrial Classification Manual" issued by the federal
office of management and budget to the third digit provided in the standard
industrial classification code, or in the North American industry
classification system code.

Sec. 8. RCW 50.29.025 and 2000 c
2 s 4 are each amended to read as follows:

The contribution rate
for each employer subject to contributions under RCW 50.24.010 shall be
determined under this section.

(1) A fund balance
ratio shall be determined by dividing the balance in the unemployment
compensation fund as of the September 30th immediately preceding the rate year
by the total remuneration paid by all employers subject to contributions during
the second calendar year preceding the rate year and reported to the department
by the following March 31st. The division shall be carried to the fourth
decimal place with the remaining fraction, if any, disregarded. The fund
balance ratio shall be expressed as a percentage.

(2) The interval of the
fund balance ratio, expressed as a percentage, shall determine which tax schedule
in subsection (5) of this section shall be in effect for assigning tax rates
for the rate year. The intervals for determining the effective tax schedule
shall be:

Interval
of the

Fund
Balance Ratio Effective

Expressed
as a Percentage Tax Schedule

2.90
and above AA

2.10 to 2.89 A

1.70 to 2.09 B

1.40 to 1.69 C

1.00
to 1.39 D

0.70
to 0.99 E

Less than 0.70 F

(3) An array shall be
prepared, listing all qualified employers in ascending order of their benefit
ratios. The array shall show for each qualified employer: (a) Identification
number; (b) benefit ratio; (c) taxable payrolls for the four calendar quarters
immediately preceding the computation date and reported to the department by
the cut-off date; (d) a cumulative total of taxable payrolls consisting of the
employer's taxable payroll plus the taxable payrolls of all other employers
preceding him or her in the array; and (e) the percentage equivalent of the
cumulative total of taxable payrolls.

(4) Each employer in
the array shall be assigned to one of twenty rate classes according to the
percentage intervals of cumulative taxable payrolls set forth in subsection (5)
of this section: PROVIDED, That if an employer's taxable payroll falls within
two or more rate classes, the employer and any other employer with the same
benefit ratio shall be assigned to the lowest rate class which includes any
portion of the employer's taxable payroll.

(5)(a) Except as
provided in RCW 50.29.026 and sections 9 and 10 of this act, the
contribution rate for each employer in the array shall be the rate specified in
the following tables for the rate class to which he or she has been assigned,
as determined under subsection (4) of this section, within the tax schedule
which is to be in effect during the rate year:

((Percent of

Cumulative Schedules of Contributions
Rates

Taxable Payrolls for Effective Tax Schedule

Rate

From To Class AA A B C D E F

0.00 5.00 1 0.47 0.47 0.57 0.97 1.47 1.87 2.47

5.01 10.00 2 0.47 0.47 0.77 1.17 1.67 2.07 2.67

10.01 15.00 3 0.57 0.57 0.97 1.37 1.77 2.27 2.87

15.01 20.00 4 0.57 0.73 1.11 1.51 1.90 2.40 2.98

20.01 25.00 5 0.72 0.92 1.30 1.70 2.09 2.59 3.08

25.01 30.00 6 0.91 1.11 1.49 1.89 2.29 2.69 3.18

30.01 35.00 7 1.00 1.29 1.69 2.08 2.48 2.88 3.27

35.01 40.00 8 1.19 1.48 1.88 2.27 2.67 3.07 3.47

40.01 45.00 9 1.37 1.67 2.07 2.47 2.87 3.27 3.66

45.01 50.00 10 1.56 1.86 2.26 2.66 3.06 3.46 3.86

50.01 55.00 11 1.84 2.14 2.45 2.85 3.25 3.66 3.95

55.01 60.00 12 2.03 2.33 2.64 3.04 3.44 3.85 4.15

60.01 65.00 13 2.22 2.52 2.83 3.23 3.64 4.04 4.34

65.01 70.00 14 2.40 2.71 3.02 3.43 3.83 4.24 4.54

70.01 75.00 15 2.68 2.90 3.21 3.62 4.02 4.43 4.63

75.01 80.00 16 2.87 3.09 3.69 3.81 4.22 4.53 4.73

80.01 85.00 17 3.27 3.47 3.77 4.17 4.57 4.87 4.97

85.01 90.00 18 3.67 3.87 4.17 4.57 4.87 4.97 5.17

90.01 95.00 19 4.07 4.27 4.57 4.97 5.07 5.17 5.37

95.01 100.00 20 5.40 5.40 5.40 5.40 5.40 5.40 5.40))

Percent of

Cumulative Schedules of
Contributions Rates

Taxable Payrolls for Effective Tax
Schedule

Rate

From To Class AA A B C D E F

0.00 5.00 1 0.47 0.47 0.62 1.02 1.47 1.87 2.47

5.01 10.00 2 0.47 0.47 0.82 1.22 1.67 2.07 2.67

10.01 15.00 3 0.57 0.57 1.02 1.42 1.77 2.27 2.87

15.01 20.00 4 0.57 0.73 1.14 1.54 1.90 2.40 2.98

20.01 25.00 5 0.72 0.92 1.30 1.70 2.09 2.59 3.08

25.01 30.00 6 0.91 1.03 1.44 1.89 2.29 2.69 3.18

30.01 35.00 7 1.00 1.17 1.61 2.08 2.48 2.88 3.27

35.01 40.00 8 1.19 1.35 1.79 2.27 2.67 3.07 3.47

40.01 45.00 9 1.37 1.52 1.97 2.47 2.87 3.27 3.66

45.01 50.00 10 1.56 1.69 2.15 2.66 3.06 3.46 3.86

50.01 55.00 11 1.84 1.95 2.33 2.85 3.25 3.66 3.95

55.01 60.00 12 2.03 2.12 2.51 3.04 3.44 3.85 4.15

60.01 65.00 13 2.22 2.29 2.69 3.23 3.64 4.04 4.34

65.01 70.00 14 2.40 2.47 2.87 3.43 3.83 4.24 4.54

70.01 75.00 15 2.64 2.68 3.05 3.62 4.02 4.43 4.63

75.01 80.00 16 2.81 2.87 3.25 3.81 4.22 4.53 4.73

80.01 85.00 17 3.27 3.30 3.58 4.17 4.57 4.87 4.97

85.01 90.00 18 3.67 3.87 4.17 4.57 4.87 4.97 5.17

90.01 95.00 19 4.10 4.30 4.60 5.00 5.10 5.20 5.40

95.01 100.00 20

20A 5.40 5.40 5.40 5.40 5.40 5.55 5.60

20B 5.40 5.45 5.50 5.55 5.60 5.65 5.70

20C 5.50 5.55 5.60 5.65 5.70 5.75 5.80

20D 5.60 5.65 5.70 5.75 5.80 5.85 5.90

20E 5.70 5.75 5.80 5.85 5.90 5.95 6.00

(b) Employers
assigned to rate class 20 shall be assigned to one of the rate classes 20A
through E as follows:

(i) Employers with a
benefit ratio of less than 0.054000 shall be assigned to rate class 20A;

(ii) Employers with
a benefit ratio of at least 0.054000 but less than 0.063000 shall be assigned
to rate class 20B;

(iii) Employers with
a benefit ratio of at least 0.063000 but less than 0.068000 shall be assigned
to rate class 20C;

(iv) Employers with
a benefit ratio of at least 0.068000 but less than 0.075000 shall be assigned
to rate class 20D; and

(v) Employers with a
benefit ratio of 0.075000 or higher shall be assigned to rate class 20E.

(c) The maximum
contribution rate for employers whose standard industrial classification code
is within major group "01," "02," or "07," or is
code "5148," or the equivalent code in the North American industry
classification system code, may not exceed the rate in rate class 20A for the
applicable rate year.

(6) Except as
provided in sections 9 and 10 of this act, the contribution rate for each
employer not qualified to be in the array shall be as follows:

(a) Employers who do
not meet the definition of "qualified employer" by reason of failure
to pay contributions when due shall be assigned a contribution rate two-tenths
higher than that in rate class 20E for the applicable rate year, except
employers who have an approved agency-deferred payment contract by September 30
of the previous rate year. If any employer with an approved agency-deferred
payment contract fails to make any one of the succeeding deferred payments or
fails to submit any succeeding tax report and payment in a timely manner, the
employer's tax rate shall immediately revert to a contribution rate two-tenths
higher than that in rate class 20E for the applicable rate year; and

(b) For all other
employers not qualified to be in the array, the contribution rate shall be a
rate equal to the average industry rate as determined by the commissioner;
however, the rate may not be less than one percent. Assignment of employers by
the commissioner to industrial classification, for purposes of this section,
shall be in accordance with established classification practices found in the
"Standard Industrial Classification Manual" issued by the federal
office of management and budget to the third digit provided in the standard
industrial classification code, or in the North American industry classification
system code.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
9. A new section is added
to chapter 50.29 RCW to read as follows:

For rate years 2003 and
2004, the contribution rate of each employer subject to contributions under RCW
50.24.010 shall include, in addition to the contribution rate under RCW
50.29.025, an insolvency surcharge of fifteen one-hundredths of one percent.
However, the insolvency surcharge is not in effect:

(1) For rate year 2003,
if, before January 1, 2003, federal Reed act moneys are transferred to the
account of this state pursuant to section 903 of the social security act (42
U.S.C. Sec. 1103), as amended, in an amount equal to or greater than fifteen
one-hundredths of one percent multiplied by the amount of total taxable payroll
for fiscal year 2002.

(2) For rate year 2004,
if the fund balance ratio under RCW 50.29.025 is equal to or greater than 1.40
on September 30, 2003.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
10. A new section is added
to chapter 50.29 RCW to read as follows:

(1) Beginning with
contributions assessed for rate year 2005, the contribution rate of each
employer subject to contributions under RCW 50.24.010 shall include, in
addition to the contribution rate under RCW 50.29.025, an equity surcharge as
determined under this section if the employer's experience rating account has
ineffective charges in at least three of the four completed fiscal years
immediately preceding the computation date. The commissioner shall determine
the equity surcharge rate for a rate year for each applicable employer as
follows:

(a) If the employer's
net ineffective charges are equal to or less than zero, no equity surcharge is
applicable to the employer. If the employer's net ineffective charges are
greater than zero, an equity surcharge is applicable to the employer.

(b) An employer's
equity surcharge rate for a rate year is equal to the net ineffective charges
divided by the employer's taxable payroll, expressed as a percentage.

(2) The equity
surcharge may not exceed four-tenths of one percent, except that for any given
rate year the maximum surcharge is six-tenths of one percent if the
commissioner determines that the total ineffective charges in the completed
fiscal year immediately preceding the computation date is greater than fifteen
percent of the total benefits paid in that fiscal year.

(3) This section does
not apply to an employer in rate class 20A through 20E whose assigned standard
industrial classification code is within major group "09" or is
"203," or the equivalent codes in the North American industry
classification system code.

(4) For purposes of
this section:

(a) "Ineffective
charges" means the dollar amount charged in the previous four completed
fiscal years to an employer's experience rating account attributable to
unemployment benefits paid to claimants that exceed the contributions paid by
the respective employer in those four fiscal years.

(b) "Net
ineffective charges" means the sum of the employer's ineffective charges
as defined in (a) of this subsection reduced by the employer's estimated
contributions.

(c) "Estimated
contributions" means the employer's taxable payroll multiplied by the
employer's contribution rate assigned under RCW 50.29.025 for the next
applicable rate year.

(d) "Taxable payroll"
means the amount of wages subject to tax for the employer as determined under
RCW 50.24.010 in the completed fiscal year immediately preceding the
computation date.

Sec. 11. RCW 50.29.010 and 1987 c
213 s 2 are each amended to read as follows:

As used in this
chapter:

(1)
"Computation date" means July 1st of any year;

(2)
"Cut-off date" means September 30th next following the computation
date;

(3)
"Qualification date" means April 1st of the ((third)) second
year preceding the computation date;

(4) "Rate
year" means the calendar year immediately following the computation date;

(5)
"Payroll" means all wages (as defined for contribution purposes) paid
by an employer to individuals in his or her employment;

(6)
"Qualified employer" means any employer who (((1))) (a)
reported some employment in the twelve-month period beginning with the
qualification date, (((2))) (b) had no period of four or more
consecutive calendar quarters for which he or she reported no employment in the
two calendar years immediately preceding the computation date, and (((3)))
(c) has submitted by the cut-off date all reports, contributions,
interest, and penalties required under this title for the period preceding the
computation date. Unpaid contributions, interest, and penalties may be
disregarded for the purposes of this section if they constitute less than
either one hundred dollars or one-half of one percent of the employer's total
tax reported for the twelve-month period immediately preceding the computation
date. Late reports, contributions, penalties, or interest from employment
defined under RCW 50.04.160 may be disregarded for the purposes of this section
if showing is made to the satisfaction of the commissioner that an otherwise
qualified employer acted in good faith and that forfeiture of qualification for
a reduced contribution rate because of such delinquency would be inequitable.

Sec. 12. RCW 50.29.062 and 1996 c
238 s 1 are each amended to read as follows:

Predecessor and
successor employer contribution rates shall be computed in the following
manner:

(1) If the successor is
an employer, as defined in RCW 50.04.080, at the time of the transfer, its
contribution rate shall remain unchanged for the remainder of the rate year in
which the transfer occurs. From and after January 1 following the transfer,
the successor's contribution rate for each rate year shall be based on its
experience with payrolls and benefits including the experience of the acquired
business or portion of a business from the date of transfer, as of the regular
computation date for that rate year.

(2) If the successor is
not an employer at the time of the transfer, it shall pay contributions at the
lowest rate determined under either of the following:

(a)(i) For transfers
before January 1, 1997, the contribution rate of the rate class assigned to the
predecessor employer at the time of the transfer for the remainder of that rate
year and continuing until the successor qualifies for a different rate in its
own right;

(ii) For transfers on
or after January 1, 1997, the contribution rate of the rate class assigned to
the predecessor employer at the time of the transfer for the remainder of that
rate year. Any experience relating to the assignment of that rate class
attributable to the predecessor is transferred to the successor. Beginning
with the January 1 following the transfer, the successor's contribution rate
shall be based on the transferred experience of the acquired business and the
successor's experience after the transfer; or

(b) The contribution
rate equal to the average industry rate as determined by the commissioner, but
not less than one percent, and continuing until the successor qualifies for a
different rate in its own right. Assignment of employers by the commissioner
to industrial classification, for purposes of this subsection, must be in
accordance with established classification practices found in the
"Standard Industrial Classification Manual" issued by the federal
office of management and budget to the third digit provided in the standard
industrial classification code, or in the North American industry
classification code system.

(3) If the successor is
not an employer at the time of the transfer and simultaneously acquires the
business or a portion of the business of two or more employers in different
rate classes, its rate from the date the transfer occurred until the end of
that rate year and until it qualifies in its own right for a new rate, shall be
the highest rate class applicable at the time of the acquisition to any
predecessor employer who is a party to the acquisition, but not less than one
percent.

(4) If the successor
is not an employer at the time of the transfer, the taxable wage base
applicable to the predecessor employer at the time of the transfer shall
continue to apply to the successor employer for the remainder of the rate year
in which the transfer occurs.

(5) The
contribution rate on any payroll retained by a predecessor employer shall
remain unchanged for the remainder of the rate year in which the transfer
occurs.

(((5))) (6)
In all cases, from and after January 1 following the transfer, the
predecessor's contribution rate for each rate year shall be based on its
experience with payrolls and benefits as of the regular computation date for
that rate year including the experience of the acquired business or portion of
business up to the date of transfer: PROVIDED, That if all of the predecessor's
business is transferred to a successor or successors, the predecessor shall not
be a qualified employer until it satisfies the requirements of a
"qualified employer" as set forth in RCW 50.29.010.

In addition to
contributions at rates computed under this section, predecessor and successor
employers are subject to contributions under rates computed as provided in
sections 9 and 10 of this act.

Sec. 13. RCW 50.24.014 and 2000 c
2 s 15 are each amended to read as follows:

(1)(a) A separate and
identifiable account to provide for the financing of special programs to assist
the unemployed is established in the administrative contingency fund.
Contributions to this account shall accrue and become payable by each employer,
except employers as described in RCW 50.44.010 and 50.44.030 who have properly
elected to make payments in lieu of contributions, taxable local government
employers as described in RCW 50.44.035, and those employers who are required
to make payments in lieu of contributions, at a basic rate of two
one-hundredths of one percent. The amount of wages subject to tax shall be
determined under RCW 50.24.010.

(b) A separate and
identifiable account is established in the administrative contingency fund for
financing the employment security department's administrative cost under RCW
50.22.150 ((and)), the costs under RCW 50.22.150(9), and the
administrative cost under chapter . . ., Laws of 2002 (this act).
Contributions to this account shall accrue and become payable by each employer,
except employers as described in RCW 50.44.010 and 50.44.030 who have properly
elected to make payments in lieu of contributions, taxable local government
employers as described in RCW 50.44.035, those employers who are required to
make payments in lieu of contributions, those employers described under RCW
50.29.025(6)(b), and those qualified employers assigned one of the rate
classes 20A through 20E under RCW 50.29.025, at a basic rate of
one one‑hundredth of one percent. The amount of wages subject to tax
shall be determined under RCW 50.24.010. ((Any amount of contributions
payable under this subsection (1)(b) that exceeds the amount that would have
been collected at a rate of four one-thousandths of one percent must be
deposited in the unemployment compensation trust fund.))

(c) For the first
calendar quarter of 1994 only, the basic two one-hundredths of one percent
contribution payable under (a) of this subsection shall be increased by
one-hundredth of one percent to a total rate of three one-hundredths of one
percent. The proceeds of this incremental one-hundredth of one percent shall
be used solely for the purposes described in section 22, chapter 483, Laws of
1993, and for the purposes of conducting an evaluation of the call center
approach to unemployment insurance under section 5, chapter 161, Laws of 1998.
During the 1997-1999 fiscal biennium, any surplus from contributions payable
under this subsection (c) may be deposited in the unemployment compensation
trust fund, used to support tax and wage automated systems projects that
simplify and streamline employer reporting, or both.

(2)(a) Contributions
under this section shall become due and be paid by each employer under rules as
the commissioner may prescribe, and shall not be deducted, in whole or in part,
from the remuneration of individuals in the employ of the employer. Any
deduction in violation of this section is unlawful.

(b) In the payment of
any contributions under this section, a fractional part of a cent shall be
disregarded unless it amounts to one-half cent or more, in which case it shall
be increased to one cent.

(3) If the commissioner
determines that federal funding has been increased to provide financing for the
services specified in chapter 50.62 RCW, the commissioner shall direct that
collection of contributions under this section be terminated on the following
January 1st.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
14. If any part of this act
is found to be in conflict with federal requirements that are a prescribed
condition to the allocation of federal funds to the state or the eligibility of
employers in this state for federal unemployment tax credits, the conflicting
part of this act is inoperative solely to the extent of the conflict, and the
finding or determination does not affect the operation of the remainder of this
act. Rules adopted under this act must meet federal requirements that are a
necessary condition to the receipt of federal funds by the state or the
granting of federal unemployment tax credits to employers in this state.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
15. If any provision of this
act or its application to any person or circumstance is held invalid, the
remainder of the act or the application of the provision to other persons or
circumstances is not affected.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
16. (1) Section 3 of this act
applies beginning with claims that have an effective date on or after July 7,
2002.

(2) Sections 5 and 7 of
this act apply to rate years beginning on or after January 1, 2003.

(3) Section 6 of this
act applies to benefits charged to the experience rating accounts of employers
for claims that have an effective date on or after July 7, 2002.

(4) Section 8 of this
act applies to rate years beginning on or after January 1, 2005.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
17. (1) Sections 7 and 9 of
this act expire January 1, 2005.

(2) Section 3 of this
act expires July 1, 2014.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
18. (1) Section 2 of this act
is necessary for the immediate preservation of the public peace, health, or
safety, or support of the state government and its existing public
institutions, and takes effect immediately.

(2)
Section 8 of this act takes effect January 1, 2005.

---
END ---