BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF
WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec.
1. A new section is added
to chapter 49.46 RCW to read as follows:

The legislature
recognizes that Washington state has a long history of being a pioneer in the
protection of worker rights. At the same time the legislature recognizes the
importance of providing reasonable predictability and certainty to employers
who seek to comply with statutory requirements. Workers and employers have a
right to expect clarity and consistency in the determination of their rights
and obligations under the law. The legislature finds that such expectations
are currently not being met. The legislature further finds that in order to
meet these expectations, workers and employers have a right to expect a clear
statutory and regulatory framework. Where state statutes are silent or
ambiguous and the state has not chosen to adopt clarifying rules, employers and
workers should be able to look to federal interpretations for clarity and
predictability.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
2. A new section is added
to chapter 49.46 RCW to read as follows:

All terms,
provisions, rights, and obligations in this chapter shall be given the same
meaning as given to comparable terms, provisions, rights, and obligations by
the federal fair labor standards act of 1938, as amended, and the regulations
interpreting and applying those terms issued by the United States department of
labor. If this chapter does not contain any term, provision, right, or
obligation contained in the federal fair labor standards act of 1938, as
amended, or in the regulations interpreting and applying those terms issued by
the United States department of labor, then such federal provisions shall
control in any action arising under this chapter. This section does not apply to
the extent any term or provision of this chapter, or any formal regulation
adopted by the department of labor and industries interpreting and applying
this chapter, is expressly contrary to the comparable provision of the federal
fair labor standards act of 1938, as amended, or the regulations interpreting
and applying those terms issued by the United States department of labor.

---
END ---