BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF
WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1. RCW 51.08.178 and 1988 c
161 s 12 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) For the purposes of
this title, the monthly wages the worker was receiving from all employment at
the time of injury shall be the basis upon which compensation is computed
unless otherwise provided specifically in the statute concerned. ((In cases
where the worker's wages are not fixed by the month, they shall be determined
by multiplying the daily wage the worker was receiving at the time of the
injury:

(a) By five, if the
worker was normally employed one day a week;

(b) By nine, if the
worker was normally employed two days a week;

(c) By thirteen, if
the worker was normally employed three days a week;

(d) By eighteen, if
the worker was normally employed four days a week;

(e) By twenty-two,
if the worker was normally employed five days a week;

(f) By twenty-six,
if the worker was normally employed six days a week;

(g) By thirty, if
the worker was normally employed seven days a week.

The term
"wages" shall include the reasonable value of board, housing, fuel,
or other consideration of like nature received from the employer as part of the
contract of hire, but shall not include overtime pay except in cases under
subsection (2) of this section. However, tips shall also be considered wages
only to the extent such tips are reported to the employer for federal income
tax purposes. The daily wage shall be the hourly wage multiplied by the number
of hours the worker is normally employed. The number of hours the worker is
normally employed shall be determined by the department in a fair and
reasonable manner, which may include averaging the number of hours worked per
day.

(2) In cases where
(a) the worker's employment is exclusively seasonal in nature or (b) the
worker's current employment or his or her relation to his or her employment is
essentially part-time or intermittent, the monthly wage shall be determined by
dividing by twelve the total wages earned, including overtime, from all
employment in any twelve successive calendar months preceding the injury which
fairly represent the claimant's employment pattern.

(3) If, within the twelve
months immediately preceding the injury, the worker has received from the
employer at the time of injury a bonus as part of the contract of hire, the
average monthly value of such bonus shall be included in determining the
worker's monthly wages.

(4) In cases where a
wage has not been fixed or cannot be reasonably and fairly determined, the
monthly wage shall be computed on the basis of the usual wage paid other
employees engaged in like or similar occupations where the wages are fixed.)) "Wages" means the gross taxable
monetary compensation paid for by the employer that is payable on an hourly,
daily, weekly, monthly, or piecework basis and which is spendable by the worker
at the end of each pay period. The worker's monthly wage shall be determined by
dividing by twelve the total wages earned from all employment, including cash
bonuses and overtime pay, in any four successive quarters in the twenty-four
months preceding the injury or occupational disease that most reasonably
represents the worker's wages.

(a) Tips shall be
considered wages only to the extent that such tips are reported to the employer
for federal income tax purposes.

(b) Wages shall
include the actual value of board, housing, and fuel received from the employer
as part of the contract of hire and for which an internal revenue service form
1099 is required. This subsection does not apply during any period in which
the employer continues to provide, through a past or current payment, board,
housing, and/or fuel that were provided to the employee at the time of the
injury or occupational disease.

(c) Wages shall not
include fringe benefits which are any consideration given to a worker in
addition to wages as defined in this section including, but not limited to:
Employer payments for or contributions for a retirement plan; pension plan;
profit sharing; stock options; medical, dental, and/or vision insurance;
employee assistance plan; substance abuse or mental health treatment or
insurance; life insurance; training; short-term or long-term disability; social
security; or other employee or beneficiary benefit plan for the employee's or
beneficiary's benefit.

(2) In cases where
the worker is self-employed or the worker's monthly wage cannot be reasonably
determined under subsection (1) of this section due to the worker sustaining an
injury less than one year after beginning employment that both the worker and
the employer intend to be continuous and lasting without limit into the
foreseeable future, and which provides wages as defined in subsection (1) of
this section, on an annualized basis, of greater than one hundred fifty percent
of wages earned by the worker in the twelve months prior to beginning such
employment, the monthly wage shall be computed on the basis of the usual wage
paid other employees of the employer at the time of injury who perform like or
similar job duties with like or similar work patterns or, if none exist, other
employees in the worker's labor market who perform like or similar job duties
with like or similar work patterns.

(3) If the employer
cannot obtain sufficient accurate information to calculate the amount of wages
before it must first pay temporary total disability compensation, it may make
payments provisionally based upon claimant's wages on the date of injury.

Sec. 2. RCW 51.32.095 and 1999 c
110 s 1 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) One of the primary
purposes of this title is to enable the injured worker to become employable at
gainful employment. To this end, the department or self-insurers shall utilize
the services of individuals and organizations, public or private, whose
experience, training, and interests in vocational rehabilitation and retraining
qualify them to lend expert assistance to the supervisor of industrial
insurance in such programs of vocational rehabilitation as may be reasonable to
make the worker employable consistent with his or her physical and mental
status. Where, after evaluation and recommendation by such individuals or
organizations and prior to final evaluation of the worker's permanent
disability and in the sole opinion of the supervisor or supervisor's designee,
whether or not medical treatment has been concluded, vocational rehabilitation
is both necessary and likely to enable the injured worker to become employable
at gainful employment, the supervisor or supervisor's designee may, in his or
her sole discretion, pay or, if the employer is a self-insurer, direct the
self-insurer to pay the cost as provided in subsection (3) of this section.

(2) When in the sole
discretion of the supervisor or the supervisor's designee vocational
rehabilitation is both necessary and likely to make the worker employable at
gainful employment, then the following order of priorities shall be used:

(a) Return to the
previous job with the same employer;

(b) Modification of the
previous job with the same employer including transitional return to work;

(c) A new job with the
same employer in keeping with any limitations or restrictions;

(d) Modification of a
new job with the same employer including transitional return to work;

(e) Modification of the
previous job with a new employer;

(f) A new job with a
new employer or self-employment based upon transferable skills;

(g) Modification of a
new job with a new employer;

(h) A new job with a
new employer or self-employment involving on-the-job training;

(i) Short-term
retraining and job placement.

(3)(a) Except as
provided in (b) of this subsection, costs for vocational rehabilitation
benefits allowed by the supervisor or supervisor's designee under subsection
(1) of this section may include the cost of books, tuition, fees, supplies,
equipment, transportation, child or dependent care, and other necessary
expenses for any such worker in an amount not to exceed three thousand dollars
in any fifty-two week period ((except as authorized by RCW 51.60.060)),
and the cost of continuing the temporary total disability compensation under
RCW 51.32.090 while the worker is actively and successfully undergoing a formal
program of vocational rehabilitation.

(b) Beginning with
vocational rehabilitation plans approved on or after July 1, 1999, costs for
vocational rehabilitation benefits allowed by the supervisor or supervisor's
designee under subsection (1) of this section may include the cost of books,
tuition, fees, supplies, equipment, child or dependent care, and other
necessary expenses for any such worker in an amount not to exceed ((four))
five thousand dollars in any fifty-two week period ((except as
authorized by RCW 51.60.060)), and the cost of transportation and
continuing the temporary total disability compensation under RCW 51.32.090
while the worker is actively and successfully undergoing a formal program of
vocational rehabilitation.

(c) The expenses
allowed under (a) or (b) of this subsection may include training fees for
on-the-job training and the cost of furnishing tools and other equipment necessary
for self-employment or reemployment. However, compensation or payment of
retraining with job placement expenses under (a) or (b) of this subsection may
not be authorized for a period of more than fifty-two weeks, except that such
period may, in the sole discretion of the supervisor after his or her review,
be extended for an additional fifty-two weeks or portion thereof by written
order of the supervisor.

(d) In cases where the
worker is required to reside away from his or her customary residence, the
reasonable cost of board and lodging shall also be paid.

(e) Costs paid under
this subsection shall be chargeable to the employer's cost experience or shall
be paid by the self-insurer as the case may be.

(4) In addition to the
vocational rehabilitation expenditures provided for under subsection (3) of
this section, an additional five thousand dollars may, upon authorization of
the supervisor or the supervisor's designee, be expended for: (a)
Accommodations for an injured worker that are medically necessary for the
worker to participate in an approved retraining plan; and (b) accommodations
necessary to perform the essential functions of an occupation in which an
injured worker is seeking employment, consistent with the retraining plan or
the recommendations of a vocational evaluation. The injured worker's attending
physician must verify the necessity of the modifications or accommodations.
The total expenditures authorized in this subsection and the expenditures
authorized under RCW 51.32.250 shall not exceed five thousand dollars.

(5) The department
shall establish criteria to monitor the quality and effectiveness of
rehabilitation services provided by the individuals and organizations used
under subsection (1) of this section. The state fund shall make referrals for
vocational rehabilitation services based on these performance criteria.

(6) The department
shall engage in, where feasible and cost-effective, a cooperative program with
the state employment security department to provide job placement services
under this section.

(7) The benefits in
this section shall be provided for the injured workers of self-insured
employers. Self-insurers shall report both benefits provided and benefits
denied under this section in the manner prescribed by the department by rule
adopted under chapter 34.05 RCW. The director may, in his or her sole
discretion and upon his or her own initiative or at any time that a dispute
arises under this section, promptly make such inquiries as circumstances
require and take such other action as he or she considers will properly
determine the matter and protect the rights of the parties.

(8) Except as otherwise
provided in this section, the benefits provided for in this section are
available to any otherwise eligible worker regardless of the date of industrial
injury. However, claims shall not be reopened solely for vocational
rehabilitation purposes.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
3. The department of labor
and industries may adopt rules necessary to implement section 1 of this act.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 4. Section 1 of this act
takes effect July 1, 2002, and applies only to claims filed on or after July 1,
2002.

---
END ---