BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF
WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec.
1. A new section is added
to chapter 82.04 RCW to read as follows:

This chapter does not
apply to amounts received by a qualified organ procurement organization under
42 U.S.C. Sec. 273(b) in effect as of January 1, 2001, to the extent that the
amounts are exempt from federal income tax.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
2. A new section is added
to chapter 82.08 RCW to read as follows:

The tax levied by RCW
82.08.020 shall not apply to the sales of medical supplies, chemicals, or
materials to an organ procurement organization exempt under section 1 of this
act. The definitions of medical supplies, chemicals, and materials in RCW
82.04.324 apply to this section. This exemption does not apply to the sale of
construction materials, office equipment, building equipment, administrative
supplies, or vehicles.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
3. A new section is added
to chapter 82.12 RCW to read as follows:

The tax levied by RCW
82.08.020 shall not apply to the use of medical supplies, chemicals, or
materials by an organ procurement organization exempt under section 1 of this
act. The definitions of medical supplies, chemicals, and materials in RCW
82.04.324 apply to this section. This exemption does not apply to the use of
construction materials, office equipment, building equipment, administrative
supplies, or vehicles.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 4. This act is necessary for
the immediate preservation of the public peace, health, or safety, or support
of the state government and its existing public institutions, and takes effect
immediately.

---
END ---