BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF
WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec.
1. Unless the context
clearly requires otherwise, the definitions in this section apply throughout
this chapter.

(1)
"Employer" means the state of Washington, counties, cities, towns, or
any other political subdivision, whose employees are members of a retirement
system under RCW 41.50.030 (1) (a) through (d) and (4).

(2) "Early
retirement" means the authorization under this chapter of temporary
retirement eligibility for the retirement systems under RCW 41.50.030 (1) (a)
through (d) and (4).

(3) "Eligible
position" means a position that conforms to the requirements for
membership in a retirement system under RCW 41.50.030 (1) (a) through (d) and
(4).

(4) "Normal
retirement" means that retirement, based on service or service and age, of
a member of a retirement system when the full retirement allowance is provided.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
2. An employer may
temporarily utilize a retirement incentive program as provided in section 3(1)
of this act if it has encountered or will be encountering one or more of the
following emergent and compelling conditions:

(1) A significant
reduction in force due to either (a) budgetary or other fiscal adjustments or
(b) significant personnel restructuring;

(2) The closure of one
or more of its facilities; and

(3) The privatization
of one or more of its agencies or services it provides.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
3. (1) An employer may
offer, adhering to all laws or regulations of the state or federal government:

(a) Retirement, with a
reduction in the retirement allowance of three percent per year for each year
of difference between the employee's age and the full retirement age for the
employee's plan, to those targeted employees who are within five years of
normal retirement;

(b) Retirement, with
full actuarial reduction of the retirement allowance, to other targeted
employees who are not within five years of normal retirement; and

(c) Other incentives
the agency or political subdivision declares appropriate, including incentives
to those already eligible to retire on normal retirement.

(2) The employer
providing early retirement as a part of a retirement incentive program under
subsection (1)(a) or (b) of this section is required to pay the full actuarial
present value of any increase in the cost to the respective retirement system
or systems resulting from persons taking the early retirement. This payment
may be made during a five-year period beginning on the date of retirement.
Interest shall be charged on payments made by the employer after the date of
the employees' retirement at a rate determined by the director.

(3) An employee who
accepts an employer's offer to retire under this section shall have their
retirement allowance suspended immediately upon reemployment with that
employer, and the retired employee's retirement allowance shall remain
suspended until the retired employee remains absent from employment with that
employer for one full calendar month.

(4) An employee who
accepts an employer's offer to retire under this section who works more than
eight hundred sixty-seven hours of postretirement employment with any employer
participating in any of the Washington state retirement systems shall have
their monthly retirement allowance suspended until the retiree remains absent
from employment with an employer for one full calendar month.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
4. Upon notification by a
political subdivision, the director of retirement systems shall, within fifteen
calendar days of receipt, inform the certified or requesting employer of the
procedures and reporting necessary to carry out any retirement incentive
program.

Sec. 5. RCW 41.32.480 and 1997 c
254 s 4 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) Any member who
separates from service after having completed thirty years of creditable
service may retire upon the approval by the department of an application for
retirement filed on the prescribed form. Upon retirement the member shall
receive a retirement allowance consisting of an annuity which shall be the
actuarial equivalent of his or her accumulated contributions at his or her age
of retirement and a pension as provided in RCW 41.32.497. Effective July 1,
1967, anyone then receiving a retirement allowance or a survivor retirement
allowance under this chapter, based on thirty-five years of creditable service,
and who has established more than thirty-five years of service credit with the
retirement system, shall thereafter receive a retirement allowance based on the
total years of service credit established.

(2) Any member who has
attained age sixty years, but who has completed less than thirty years of
creditable service, upon separation from service, may retire upon the approval
by the department of an application for retirement filed on the prescribed
form. Upon retirement the member shall receive a retirement allowance
consisting of an annuity which shall be the actuarial equivalent of his or her
accumulated contributions at his or her age of retirement and a pension as
provided in RCW 41.32.497.

(3) Any member who has
attained age fifty-five years and who has completed not less than twenty-five
years of creditable service, upon separation from service, may retire upon the
approval by the department of an application for retirement filed on the
prescribed form. Upon retirement the member shall receive a retirement
allowance which shall be the actuarial equivalent of his or her accumulated
contributions at his or her age of retirement and a pension as provided in RCW
41.32.497. An individual who has retired pursuant to this subsection, on or
after July 1, 1969, shall not suffer an actuarial reduction in his or her
retirement allowance, except as the allowance may be actuarially reduced
pursuant to the options contained in RCW 41.32.530. The chapter 193, Laws of
1974 ex. sess. amendment to this section shall be retroactive to July 1, 1969.

(4) Subsections (1)
through (3) of this section may be temporarily superseded by the provisions of
a certified retirement incentive program initiated under section 3 of this act.

Sec. 6. RCW 41.32.765 and 2000 c
247 s 902 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) NORMAL RETIREMENT.
Any member with at least five service credit years of service who has attained
at least age sixty-five shall be eligible to retire and to receive a retirement
allowance computed according to the provisions of RCW 41.32.760.

(2) EARLY RETIREMENT.
Any member who has completed at least twenty service credit years of service
who has attained at least age fifty-five shall be eligible to retire and to
receive a retirement allowance computed according to the provisions of RCW 41.32.760,
except that a member retiring pursuant to this subsection shall have the
retirement allowance actuarially reduced to reflect the difference in the
number of years between age at retirement and the attainment of age sixty-five.

(3) ALTERNATE EARLY RETIREMENT.
Any member who has completed at least thirty service credit years and has
attained age fifty-five shall be eligible to retire and to receive a retirement
allowance computed according to the provisions of RCW 41.32.760, except that a
member retiring pursuant to this subsection shall have the retirement allowance
reduced by three percent per year to reflect the difference in the number of
years between age at retirement and the attainment of age sixty-five.

(4) Subsections (1)
through (3) of this section may be temporarily superseded by the provisions of
a certified retirement incentive program initiated under section 3 of this act.

Sec. 7. RCW 41.32.875 and 2000 c
247 s 903 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) NORMAL RETIREMENT.
Any member who is at least age sixty-five and who has:

(a) Completed ten
service credit years; or

(b) Completed five
service credit years, including twelve service credit months after attaining
age fifty-four; or

(c) Completed five service
credit years by July 1, 1996, under plan 2 and who transferred to plan 3 under
RCW 41.32.817;

shall be eligible to retire
and to receive a retirement allowance computed according to the provisions of
RCW 41.32.840.

(2) EARLY RETIREMENT.
Any member who has attained at least age fifty-five and has completed at least
ten years of service shall be eligible to retire and to receive a retirement
allowance computed according to the provisions of RCW 41.32.840, except that a
member retiring pursuant to this subsection shall have the retirement allowance
actuarially reduced to reflect the difference in the number of years between
age at retirement and the attainment of age sixty-five.

(3) ALTERNATE EARLY
RETIREMENT. Any member who has completed at least thirty service credit years
and has attained age fifty-five shall be eligible to retire and to receive a
retirement allowance computed according to the provisions of RCW 41.32.840,
except that a member retiring pursuant to this subsection shall have the retirement
allowance reduced by three percent per year to reflect the difference in the
number of years between age at retirement and the attainment of age sixty-five.

(4) Subsections (1)
through (3) of this section may be temporarily superseded by the provisions of
a certified retirement incentive program initiated under section 3 of this act.

Sec. 8. RCW 41.35.420 and 2000 c
247 s 905 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) NORMAL RETIREMENT.
Any member with at least five service credit years who has attained at least
age sixty-five shall be eligible to retire and to receive a retirement
allowance computed according to the provisions of RCW 41.35.400.

(2) EARLY RETIREMENT.
Any member who has completed at least twenty service credit years and has
attained age fifty-five shall be eligible to retire and to receive a retirement
allowance computed according to the provisions of RCW 41.35.400, except that a
member retiring pursuant to this subsection shall have the retirement allowance
actuarially reduced to reflect the difference in the number of years between
age at retirement and the attainment of age sixty-five.

(3) ALTERNATE EARLY
RETIREMENT. Any member who has completed at least thirty service credit years
and has attained age fifty-five shall be eligible to retire and to receive a
retirement allowance computed according to the provisions of RCW 41.35.400,
except that a member retiring pursuant to this subsection shall have the
retirement allowance reduced by three percent per year to reflect the
difference in the number of years between age at retirement and the attainment
of age sixty-five.

(4) Subsections (1)
through (3) of this section may be temporarily superseded by the provisions of
a certified retirement incentive program initiated under section 3 of this act.

Sec. 9. RCW 41.35.680 and 2000 c
247 s 906 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) NORMAL RETIREMENT.
Any member who is at least age sixty-five and who has:

(a) Completed ten service
credit years; or

(b) Completed five
service credit years, including twelve service credit months after attaining
age fifty-four; or

(c) Completed five
service credit years by September 1, 2000, under the public employees'
retirement system plan 2 and who transferred to plan 3 under RCW 41.35.510;

shall be eligible to retire
and to receive a retirement allowance computed according to the provisions of
RCW 41.35.620.

(2) EARLY RETIREMENT.
Any member who has attained at least age fifty-five and has completed at least
ten years of service shall be eligible to retire and to receive a retirement
allowance computed according to the provisions of RCW 41.35.620, except that a
member retiring pursuant to this subsection shall have the retirement allowance
actuarially reduced to reflect the difference in the number of years between
age at retirement and the attainment of age sixty-five.

(3) ALTERNATE EARLY
RETIREMENT. Any member who has completed at least thirty service credit years
and has attained age fifty-five shall be eligible to retire and to receive a
retirement allowance computed according to the provisions of RCW 41.35.620,
except that a member retiring pursuant to this subsection shall have the
retirement allowance reduced by three percent per year to reflect the
difference in the number of years between age at retirement and the attainment
of age sixty-five.

(4) Subsections (1)
through (3) of this section may be temporarily superseded by the provisions of
a certified retirement incentive program initiated under section 3 of this act.

Sec. 10. RCW 41.40.180 and 1982
1st ex.s. c 52 s 21 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) Any member with
five years of creditable service who has attained age sixty and any original
member who has attained age sixty may retire on written application to the
director, setting forth at what time the member desires to be retired:
PROVIDED, That in the national interest, during time of war engaged in by the
United States, the director may extend beyond age sixty, subject to the
provisions of subsection (2) of this section, the age at which any member may
be eligible to retire.

(2) Any member who has
completed thirty years of service may retire on written application to the
director setting forth at what time the member desires to be retired, subject
to war measures.

(3) Any member who has
completed twenty-five years of service and attained age fifty-five may retire
on written application to the director setting forth at what time the member
desires to be retired, subject to war measures.

(4) Any individual who
is eligible to retire pursuant to subsections (1) through (3) of this section
shall be allowed to retire while on any authorized leave of absence not in
excess of one hundred and twenty days.

(5) Subsections (1)
through (3) of this section may be temporarily superseded by the provisions of
a certified retirement incentive program initiated under section 3 of this act.

Sec. 11. RCW 41.40.630 and 2000 c
247 s 901 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) NORMAL RETIREMENT.
Any member with at least five service credit years who has attained at least
age sixty-five shall be eligible to retire and to receive a retirement
allowance computed according to the provisions of RCW 41.40.620.

(2) EARLY RETIREMENT.
Any member who has completed at least twenty service credit years and has
attained age fifty-five shall be eligible to retire and to receive a retirement
allowance computed according to the provisions of RCW 41.40.620, except that a
member retiring pursuant to this subsection shall have the retirement allowance
actuarially reduced to reflect the difference in the number of years between
age at retirement and the attainment of age sixty-five.

(3) ALTERNATE EARLY
RETIREMENT. Any member who has completed at least thirty service credit years
and has attained age fifty-five shall be eligible to retire and to receive a
retirement allowance computed according to the provisions of RCW 41.40.620,
except that a member retiring pursuant to this subsection shall have the
retirement allowance reduced by three percent per year to reflect the
difference in the number of years between age at retirement and the attainment
of age sixty-five.

(4) Subsections (1)
through (3) of this section may be temporarily superseded by the provisions of
a certified retirement incentive program initiated under section 3 of this act.

Sec. 12. RCW 41.40.820 and 2000 c
247 s 309 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) NORMAL RETIREMENT.
Any member who is at least age sixty-five and who has:

(a) Completed ten
service credit years; or

(b) Completed five
service credit years, including twelve service credit months after attaining
age fifty-four; or

(c) Completed five
service credit years by the transfer payment date specified in RCW 41.40.795,
under the public employees' retirement system plan 2 and who transferred to
plan 3 under RCW 41.40.795;

shall be eligible to retire
and to receive a retirement allowance computed according to the provisions of
RCW 41.40.790.

(2) EARLY RETIREMENT.
Any member who has attained at least age fifty-five and has completed at least
ten years of service shall be eligible to retire and to receive a retirement
allowance computed according to the provisions of RCW 41.40.790, except that a
member retiring pursuant to this subsection shall have the retirement allowance
actuarially reduced to reflect the difference in the number of years between
age at retirement and the attainment of age sixty-five.

(3) ALTERNATE EARLY
RETIREMENT. Any member who has completed at least thirty service credit years
and has attained age fifty-five shall be eligible to retire and to receive a
retirement allowance computed according to the provisions of RCW 41.40.790, except
that a member retiring pursuant to this subsection shall have the retirement
allowance reduced by three percent per year to reflect the difference in the
number of years between age at retirement and the attainment of age sixty-five.

(4) Subsections (1)
through (3) of this section may be temporarily superseded by the provisions of
a certified retirement incentive program initiated under section 3 of this act.

Sec. 13. RCW 43.43.250 and 1982
1st ex.s. c 52 s 26 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) Any member who has
attained the age of sixty years shall be retired on the first day of the
calendar month next succeeding that in which said member shall have attained
the age of sixty: PROVIDED, That the requirement to retire at age sixty shall
not apply to a member serving as chief of the Washington state patrol.

(2) Any member who has
completed twenty-five years of credited service or has attained the age of
fifty-five may apply to retire as provided in RCW 43.43.260, by completing and
submitting an application form to the department, setting forth at what time
the member desires to be retired.

(3) Subsections (1)
and (2) of this section may be temporarily superseded by the provisions of a
certified retirement incentive program initiated under section 3 of this act.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
14. Sections 1 through 4 of
this act constitute a new chapter in Title 41 RCW.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 15. This act expires June 30,
2003.

---
END ---