BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF
WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1. RCW 4.84.370 and 1995 c
347 s 718 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) Notwithstanding any
other provisions of this chapter, reasonable attorneys’ fees and costs shall be
awarded to the prevailing party or substantially prevailing party on appeal
before the court of appeals or the supreme court of a decision by a county,
city, or town to issue, condition, or deny a development permit involving a
site-specific rezone, zoning, plat, conditional use, variance, shoreline permit,
building permit, site plan, or similar land use approval or decision. The
court shall award and determine the amount of reasonable attorneys’ fees and
costs under this section if:

(a) The prevailing
party on appeal was the prevailing or substantially prevailing party before the
county, city, or town, or in a decision involving a substantial development
permit under chapter 90.58 RCW, the prevailing party on appeal was the
prevailing party or the substantially prevailing party before the ((shoreline[s]))
shorelines hearings board; and

(b) The prevailing
party on appeal was the prevailing party or substantially prevailing party in
all prior judicial proceedings.

(2) In addition to the
prevailing party under subsection (1) of this section, the county, city, or
town whose decision is on appeal is considered a prevailing party if its
decision is upheld at superior court and on appeal.

(3) A
party filing for appeal with the court of appeals or supreme court shall, at
the time of filing, file with the court a bond in an amount to be determined by
the supreme court. The amount shall be a predetermined amount that covers the
average cost of attorneys' fees for land use appeals subject to this section.

--- END ---