BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF
WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1. RCW 67.70.110 and 1982
2nd ex.s. c 7 s 11 are each amended to read as follows:

A person shall not sell
a ticket or share at a price greater than ((that fixed by rule of the
commission)) two dollars for one ticket or five dollars for three
tickets. No person other than a licensed lottery sales agent shall sell
lottery tickets, except that nothing in this section prevents any person from
giving lottery tickets or shares to another as a gift.

Sec. 2. RCW 67.70.200 and 1987 c
511 s 9 are each amended to read as follows:

(1)(a) The
director, in his or her discretion, ((may)) will require
any or all lottery sales agents to deposit to the credit of the state lottery
account in banks designated by the state treasurer, ((all)) at least
seventy-five percent of the moneys received by such agents from the sale of
lottery tickets or shares((, less the amount, if any,)).

(b) The amount not
deposited into the state lottery account may be retained as compensation
for the sale of the tickets or shares, ((and)) or deposited to the
credit of the state lottery account.

(2) The director may
require any or all lottery sales agents to file with the director or his or
her designated agents, reports of their receipts and transactions in the
sale of lottery tickets in such form and containing such information as ((he))
the director may require. The director may make such arrangements for
any person, including a bank, to perform such functions, activities, or
services in connection with the operation of the lottery as he or she may deem
advisable pursuant to this chapter and the rules of the commission, and such
functions, activities, or services shall constitute lawful functions,
activities, and services of such person.

Sec. 3. RCW 67.70.240 and 2001 c
3 s 4 (Initiative Measure No. 728) are each amended to read as follows:

The moneys in the state
lottery account shall be used only:

(1) For the payment of
prizes to the holders of winning lottery tickets or shares;

(2) For purposes of
funding K-12 education and reducing tuition costs at Washington institutions of
higher education. However, this subsection applies only to moneys that are
required to be deposited to the credit of the state lottery account in RCW
67.70.200(1)(a);

(3) For purposes
of making deposits into the reserve account created by RCW 67.70.250 and into
the lottery administrative account created by RCW 67.70.260;

(((3))) (4)
For purposes of making deposits into the education construction fund and student
achievement fund created in RCW 43.135.045. For the transition period from
July 1, 2001, until and including June 30, 2002, fifty percent of the moneys
not otherwise obligated under this section shall be placed in the student
achievement fund and fifty percent of these moneys shall be placed in the
education construction fund. On and after July 1, 2002, until June 30, 2004,
seventy-five percent of these moneys shall be placed in the student achievement
fund and twenty-five percent shall be placed in the education construction
fund. On and after July 1, 2004, all deposits not otherwise obligated under
this section shall be placed in the education construction fund. Moneys in the
state lottery account deposited in the education construction fund and the
student achievement fund are included in "general state revenues"
under RCW 39.42.070;

(((4))) (5)
For distribution to a county for the purpose of paying the principal and
interest payments on bonds issued by the county to construct a baseball
stadium, as defined in RCW 82.14.0485, including reasonably necessary
preconstruction costs. Three million dollars shall be distributed under this
subsection during calendar year 1996. During subsequent years, such
distributions shall equal the prior year's distributions increased by four
percent. Distributions under this subsection shall cease when the bonds issued
for the construction of the baseball stadium are retired, but not more than
twenty years after the tax under RCW 82.14.0485 is first imposed;

(((5))) (6)
For distribution to the stadium and exhibition center account, created in RCW
43.99N.060. Subject to the conditions of RCW 43.99N.070, six million dollars
shall be distributed under this subsection during the calendar year 1998.
During subsequent years, such distribution shall equal the prior year's
distributions increased by four percent. No distribution may be made under
this subsection after December 31, 1999, unless the conditions for issuance of
the bonds under RCW 43.99N.020(2) are met. Distributions under this subsection
shall cease when the bonds are retired, but not later than December 31, 2020;

(((6))) (7)
For the purchase and promotion of lottery games and game-related services; and

(((7))) (8)
For the payment of agent compensation.

The office
of financial management shall require the allotment of all expenses paid from
the account and shall report to the ways and means committees of the senate and
house of representatives any changes in the allotments.

---
END ---