BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF
WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec.
1. A new section is added
to chapter 28B.10 RCW to read as follows:

The state financial aid
account is created in the custody of the state treasurer. The primary purpose
of the account is to create a reserve to ensure that all appropriations
designated for financial aid through statewide student financial aid programs
are made available to eligible students. Expenditures from the account may be
used only for financial aid to students eligible for the state need grant
program, the state work study program, the Washington scholars program, or the
Washington award for vocational excellence program. Only the executive
director of the higher education coordinating board or the executive director's
designee may authorize expenditures from the account. The account is subject
to the allotment procedures under chapter 43.88 RCW, but an appropriation is
not required for expenditures.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 2. This act takes effect
July 1, 2002.

---
END ---