BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF
WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1. RCW 90.48.020 and 1995 c
255 s 7 are each amended to read as follows:

Whenever the word
"person" is used in this chapter, it shall be construed to include
any political subdivision, government agency, municipality, industry, public or
private corporation, copartnership, association, firm, individual or any other
entity whatsoever.

Wherever the words
"waters of the state" shall be used in this chapter, they shall be
construed to include lakes, rivers, ponds, streams, inland waters, underground
waters, salt waters and all other surface waters and watercourses within the
jurisdiction of the state of Washington. However, artificially created
industrial ponds, including, but not limited to, waste treatment systems,
including treatment ponds or lagoons designed to meet the requirements of the
federal water pollution control act 33 U.S.C. Sec. 1251 et seq. are not
considered to be waters of the state for purposes of this chapter.

Whenever the word
"pollution" is used in this chapter, it shall be construed to mean
such contamination, or other alteration of the physical, chemical or biological
properties, of any waters of the state, including change in temperature, taste,
color, turbidity, or odor of the waters, or such discharge of any liquid,
gaseous, solid, radioactive, or other substance into any waters of the state as
will or is likely to create a nuisance or render such waters harmful,
detrimental or injurious to the public health, safety or welfare, or to
domestic, commercial, industrial, agricultural, recreational, or other
legitimate beneficial uses, or to livestock, wild animals, birds, fish or other
aquatic life.

Wherever the word
"department" is used in this chapter it shall mean the department of
ecology.

Whenever the word
"director" is used in this chapter it shall mean the director of
ecology.

Whenever
the words "aquatic noxious weed" are used in this chapter, they have
the meaning prescribed under RCW 17.26.020.

---
END ---