BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF
WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec.
1. It is the intent of the
legislature to articulate the fiduciary responsibilities of the trustees and
others who oversee the public retirement systems. The legislature also intends
to promote effective monitoring of public retirement systems by requiring
regular and significant disclosure of the financial, actuarial, auditing,
contractual, and legal status of the systems to participants and their
beneficiaries and to the public.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
2. (1)(a) The state pension board
is created. The board is for the benefit of and represents the members and
retirees of the public employees', school employees', and teachers' retirement
systems and consists of the following members:

(i) Four
representatives of active members of the state retirement system appointed by
the governor for staggered three-year terms with initial appointments of one,
two, and three years;

(ii) Two
representatives of retired members of the state retirement system appointed by
the governor for staggered three-year terms with initial appointments of two
and three years, with no two retiree representatives from the same system;

(iii) As ex officio
nonvoting members, the director of the department of retirement systems, the
director of financial management, and the executive director of the state
investment board;

(iv) Four members of
the legislature, with one member each representing the two largest caucuses in
the senate and house of representatives, appointed by the president of the
senate and the speaker of the house of representatives; and

(v) One representative
of local government employers and one representative of school directors, each
appointed by the governor.

(b)(i) The board shall
establish policies and procedures for its internal management, including an
independent audit every two years and an operating budget sufficient to perform
its statutory duties.

(ii) The board shall
allocate its expenses among the participating retirement systems on a prorated
basis determined by membership.

(2) The board shall
provide open and balanced review of state pension policy issues, recommend
state retirement system contribution rates to the legislature, and report on
the long-term assumptions used in developing those rates and reviewing pension
policy.

(a) The board shall
recommend pension contribution rates as set forth in chapter 41.45 RCW.

(b) The board shall
advise and recommend proposed changes in pension policy and legislation to the
legislature.

(c) The board shall
advise the department of retirement systems on the preparation of the summary
level and consolidated annual financial report.

(d) The board shall
appoint an actuary to advise the board.

(3) The board shall
from time to time make written recommendations to the legislature concerning
deficiencies, conflicts, or obsolete provisions in, and need for reorganization
or revision of, the statutes governing pension policy, and shall prepare for
submission to the legislature, legislation for the correction or removal of
those deficiencies, conflicts, or obsolete provisions, or to otherwise improve
the form or substance of any portion of the statute law of this state as the
public interest or the administration of pension policy may require.

(4)The board shall
discharge its duties:

(a) Solely in the
interest of the participants and beneficiaries;

(b) Impartially, taking
into account any differing interests of participants and beneficiaries; and

(c) In accordance with
a good faith interpretation of the law governing the retirement systems.

(5) The director of
retirement systems shall provide staff and equipment as necessary.

Sec. 3. RCW 41.45.020 and 2001
2nd sp.s. c 11 s 4 and 2001 2nd sp.s. c 11 s 3 are each reenacted and amended
to read as follows:

As used in this
chapter, the following terms have the meanings indicated unless the context
clearly requires otherwise.

(1) (("Council"))
"Board" means the state pension ((funding council))
board created in ((RCW 41.45.100)) section 2 of this act.

(2) "Department"
means the department of retirement systems.

(3) "Law
enforcement officers' and fire fighters' retirement system plan 1" and
"law enforcement officers' and fire fighters' retirement system plan
2" means the benefits and funding provisions under chapter 41.26 RCW.

(4) (("Restated
law enforcement officers' and fire fighters' retirement system defined benefit
plan" means the benefits and funding provisions under chapter 41.26A RCW.

(5))) "Public employees' retirement system plan
1," "public employees' retirement system plan 2," and
"public employees' retirement system plan 3" mean the benefits and
funding provisions under chapter 41.40 RCW.

(((6))) (5)
"Teachers' retirement system plan 1," "teachers' retirement
system plan 2," and "teachers' retirement system plan 3" mean
the benefits and funding provisions under chapter 41.32 RCW.

(((7))) (6)
"School employees' retirement system plan 2" and "school
employees' retirement system plan 3" mean the benefits and funding
provisions under chapter 41.35 RCW.

(((8))) (7)
"Washington state patrol retirement system" means the retirement
benefits provided under chapter 43.43 RCW.

(((9))) (8)
"Unfunded liability" means the unfunded actuarial accrued liability
of a retirement system.

(((10))) (9)
"Actuary" or "state actuary" means the state actuary
employed under chapter 44.44 RCW.

(((11))) (10)
"State retirement systems" means the retirement systems listed in RCW
41.50.030.

(((12))) (11)
"Classified employee" means a member of the Washington school
employees' retirement system plan 2 or plan 3 as defined in RCW 41.35.010.

(((13))) (12)
"Teacher" means a member of the teachers' retirement system as
defined in RCW 41.32.010(15).

Sec. 4. RCW 41.45.030 and 2001
2nd sp.s. c 11 s 5 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) Beginning April 1,
2004, and every four years thereafter, the state actuary shall submit to the ((council))
board information regarding the experience and financial condition of
each state retirement system. The ((council)) board shall review
this and such other information as it may require.

(2) By May 31, 2004,
and every four years thereafter, the ((council, by affirmative vote of four
councilmembers,)) board may adopt changes to the long-term economic
assumptions established in RCW 41.45.035. Any changes adopted by the ((council
shall be)) board are subject to revision by the legislature.

The ((council)) board
shall consult with the economic and revenue forecast supervisor and the
executive director of the state investment board, and shall consider long-term
historical averages, in reviewing possible changes to the economic assumptions.

(3) The assumptions and
the asset value smoothing technique established in RCW 41.45.035, as modified
in the future by the ((council)) board or legislature, shall be
used by the state actuary in conducting all actuarial studies of the state
retirement systems, including actuarial fiscal notes under RCW 44.44.040. The
assumptions shall also be used for the administration of benefits under the
retirement plans listed in RCW 41.45.020, pursuant to timelines and conditions
established by department rules.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
5. Effective July 1, 2003,
the following acts or parts of acts are each repealed:

(1) RCW 41.45.100 (Pension funding
council--Created) and 1998 c 283 s 2;

(2) RCW 41.45.110 (Pension funding
council--Audits required) and 1998 c 283 s 3; and

(3) RCW 41.45.120 (Pension funding work
group) and 1998 c 283 s 4.

Sec. 6. RCW 41.45.090 and 1998 c
283 s 7 are each amended to read as follows:

The department shall
collect and keep in convenient form such data as shall be necessary for an
actuarial valuation of the assets and liabilities of the state retirement
systems, and for making an actuarial investigation into the mortality, service,
compensation, and other experience of the members and beneficiaries of those
systems. The department and state actuary shall enter into a memorandum of
understanding regarding the specific data the department will collect, when it
will be collected, and how it will be maintained. The department shall notify
the ((state actuary)) pension board of any changes it makes, or
intends to make, in the collection and maintenance of such data.

At least once in each
six-year period, the state actuary shall conduct an actuarial experience study
of the mortality, service, compensation and other experience of the members and
beneficiaries of each state retirement system, and into the financial condition
of each system. The results of each investigation shall be filed with the
department, the office of financial management, the budget writing committees
of the Washington house of representatives and senate, and the pension ((funding
council)) board. Upon the basis of such actuarial investigation the
department, with approval of the pension board, shall adopt such tables,
schedules, factors, and regulations as are deemed necessary in the light of the
findings of the actuary or the pension board for the proper operation of
the state retirement systems.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
7. A new section is added
to chapter 41.50 RCW to read as follows:

The department of
retirement systems, under direction of the state pension board, is to produce a
summary level and consolidated annual financial report with the focus of
presenting information about the status of the various retirement plans to
active and retired members, policy makers, and other interested parties.
Information included in the report is to be provided by the office of the state
actuary, any actuary advising the pension board, the state investment board,
and the department of retirement systems. The department shall consult with
the state investment board and the office of the state actuary during the
preparation of this report. The report shall be concise and understandable as
determined by the users of this information. The department shall meet with
the active and retired members of the retirement systems in order to ensure the
usability of the report. In addition, the department shall give annual notice
of report review and then accept and consider input on the style and substance
of the report from interested parties.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
8. A new section is added
to chapter 41.50 RCW to read as follows:

Beginning in 2004 and
every four years thereafter, the department of retirement systems, under the
direction of the state pension board, shall convene a task force comprised of
representatives of the department of retirement systems, the office of the
state actuary, the state investment board, the office of financial management,
and the office of the state auditor. This task force shall review all the
major reports prepared by state agencies concerning the state retirement
systems and examine the best practices from other states. The goals of the
task force are to determine what information needs to be reported and to seek
ways to: Promote more effective monitoring of the public retirement systems,
streamline reporting, become more efficient in the production and distribution
of the information, minimize redundancies and confusion, and maximize the
public's investment in these reports. The task force shall report by the end
of October in each year the task force is convened to the state pension board
with their recommendations for changing and consolidating these reports. Any
changes in current state law that may be required to accomplish these
recommendations shall be noted.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
9. Sections 1 and 2 of this
act are each added to chapter 41.45 RCW.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
10. The department of
retirement systems and the office of the state actuary shall prepare and submit
to the fiscal committees of the legislature by December 15, 2002, proposed
legislation for implementing this act.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
11. Except for section 10 of
this act, this act takes effect July 1, 2003.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 12. If any provision of this
act or its application to any person or circumstance is held invalid, the
remainder of the act or the application of the provision to other persons or
circumstances is not affected.

---
END ---