BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF
WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec.
1. The employment security
department must study the impact of the state minimum wage increase under
section 1, chapter 1, Laws of 1999 (Initiative Measure No. 688, approved
November 3, 1998). The department must contract with the University of
Washington and cooperate in supplying data to the university for purposes of
the study. The university must choose an advisory committee to advise the
university on the design of the study. The committee will consist of an equal
number of economists who supported the minimum wage initiative and who opposed
the initiative, and an equal number of representatives of labor and of
business. The minimum wage study will include the identification of the
affected population of employers and employees, and a survey of a sample of the
affected population. The survey instrument will include questions regarding
the longitudinal impact of the initiative on wages, employment, employee hours,
employee benefits, tip income, productivity, prices, business closures and
openings, social welfare payments, and the demographic characteristics of the
affected population. To the extent possible, the study will show the
comparative impact on employees and businesses in eastern and western
Washington. The study will also attempt to verify the information provided by
survey respondents. A report of findings will be presented to the governor and
the legislature by December 1, 2004.

Sec. 2. RCW 49.46.020 and 1999 c
1 s 1 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) Until January 1,
1999, every employer shall pay to each of his or her employees who has reached
the age of eighteen years wages at a rate of not less than four dollars and
ninety cents per hour.

(2) Beginning January
1, 1999, and until January 1, 2000, every employer shall pay to each of his or
her employees who has reached the age of eighteen years wages at a rate of not
less than five dollars and seventy cents per hour.

(3) Beginning January
1, 2000, and until January 1, 2001, every employer shall pay to each of his or
her employees who has reached the age of eighteen years wages at a rate of not
less than six dollars and fifty cents per hour.

(4)(a) Beginning on
January 1, 2001, and each following January 1st as set forth under (b) of this
subsection, every employer shall pay to each of his or her employees who has
reached the age of eighteen years wages at a rate of not less than the amount
established under (b) of this subsection.

(b) Except as
provided in subsection (5) of this section, on September 30, 2000, and on
each following September 30th, the department of labor and industries shall
calculate an adjusted minimum wage rate to maintain employee purchasing power
by increasing the current year's minimum wage rate by the rate of inflation.
The adjusted minimum wage rate shall be calculated to the nearest cent using
the consumer price index for urban wage earners and clerical workers, CPI-W, or
a successor index, for the twelve months prior to each September 1st as
calculated by the United States department of labor. Each adjusted minimum
wage rate calculated under this subsection (4)(b) takes effect on the following
January 1st.

(5) Beginning
January 1, 2003, and until January 1, 2006, every employer shall pay to each of
his or her employees who has reached the age of eighteen years wages at a rate
of not less than six dollars and ninety cents per hour.

(6)
The director shall by ((regulation)) rule establish the minimum
wage for employees under the age of eighteen years.

---
END ---