BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF
WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1. RCW 49.17.060 and 1973 c
80 s 6 are each amended to read as follows:

Each employer:

(1) Shall furnish to
each of his or her employees a place of employment free from recognized
hazards that are causing or likely to cause serious injury or death to his or
her employees((: PROVIDED, That)). However, no citation or
order assessing a penalty shall be issued to any employer solely under the
authority of this subsection except where no applicable rule ((or regulation))
has been adopted by the department covering the unsafe or unhealthful condition
of employment at the workplace; and

(2) Shall
((comply)) furnish to each of his or her employees a place of
employment in compliance with the rules((, regulations,)) and orders
((promulgated)) adopted under this chapter.

--- END ---