BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF
WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec.
1. (1) The legislature finds
that in order to enhance income and employment opportunities for all residents,
the state's economic development programs must:

(a) Make strategic
targeted investment of limited resources in order to have meaningful impact;

(b) Invest public
resources in those efforts that offer the greatest return to the region or
local community; and

(c) Promote strong
public and private partnerships that enhance the capacity for successful
regional or local economic development.

(2) It is the goal of
this chapter to provide financial resources for a limited time to assist local
governments in the financing of public infrastructure improvements that are
needed to:

(a) Encourage private
development of selected areas;

(b) Prevent or arrest the
decay of selected areas due to the inability of existing financing methods to
provide needed public infrastructure improvements; and

(c) Encourage private
investment designed to promote and facilitate the orderly redevelopment of
selected areas.

PART I‑-COMMUNITY
REVITALIZATION FINANCING

NEW SECTION. Sec.
2. The definitions in this
section apply throughout this chapter unless the context clearly requires
otherwise.

(1) "Apportionment
district" means the geographic area from which taxes are to be
appropriated to finance a community revitalization project.

(2) "Taxes"
means excise taxes.

(3) "Excise
taxes" means:

(a) Retail sales tax
levied under chapter 82.08 RCW;

(b) Use tax levied
under chapter 82.12 RCW; or

(c) Local retail sales
and use taxes levied under RCW 82.14.030.

"Excise
taxes" do not include sales and use taxes levied under RCW 82.14.340 and
82.14.350.

(4) "Local
government" means any city or town located in a county with population
densities greater than one hundred and one persons per square mile as
determined by the office financial management and published each year by the
department of revenue for the period July 1st to June 30th.

(5) "Ordinance"
means any appropriate method of taking legislative action by a local
government.

(6) "Project
agreement" means an agreement between an owner and a municipality
authorized under this chapter.

(7) "Sponsor"
means a local government initiating and undertaking a community revitalization
project.

(8) "Tax
allocation revenues" means those tax revenues allocated to a sponsor under
this chapter.

(9) "Taxing
district" means a governmental entity that levies a tax that is collected
within a proposed or approved apportionment district.

(10) "Community
revitalization project" means:

(a) Infrastructure
improvements within the apportionment district that include, but are not
limited to:

(i) Street and road
construction and maintenance;

(ii) Water and sewer
system construction and improvements;

(iii) Sidewalks and
streetlights;

(iv) Parking, terminal,
and dock facilities;

(v) Public
transportation facilities; and

(vi) Park facilities
and recreational areas;

(b) Health and safety
improvements authorized to be publicly financed under chapter 35.80 or 35.81
RCW;

(c) Publicly owned or
leased facilities within the jurisdiction of a local government which the
sponsor has authority to provide; and

(d) Expenditure for any
of the following purposes:

(i) Providing environmental
analysis, professional management, planning, and promotion within the
apportionment district, including the management and promotion of retail trade
activities in the apportionment district;

(ii) Providing
maintenance and security for common or public areas in the apportionment
district; or

(iii) Historic
preservation activities authorized under RCW 35.21.395.

(11) "Community
revitalization project costs" means: The costs of land use planning and
associated environmental analysis, project design and planning, acquisition,
site preparation, construction, reconstruction, rehabilitation, improvement,
operation, and installation of the community revitalization project; the costs
of relocation, maintenance, and operation of property pending construction of
the community revitalization project; the costs of financing, including
interest during construction, legal and other professional services, taxes, and
insurance; the costs of apportioning the taxes and complying with this chapter
and other applicable law; and the administrative costs reasonably necessary and
related to these costs.

(12) "Community
revitalization project ordinance" means the ordinance passed under section
5 of this act.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
3. The use of tax revenues
to finance community revitalization projects is subject to the following
limitations:

(1) Regardless of the
total number of community revitalization projects approved by a local government,
the aggregate total of revenue available from the state for apportionment as
the state's contribution to an individual local government must not exceed five
million dollars annually. All revenue in excess of five million dollars in any
given year must be distributed to the appropriate taxing district as though an
apportionment district had not been created;

(2) Regardless of the
number of community revitalization projects approved by local governments, the
aggregate total of revenue available from the state for apportionment as the
state's contribution is annually limited to two-tenths of one percent of the
state general fund annual budget;

(3) An apportionment
district may not be established that includes a geographic area included within
a previously established apportionment district that has outstanding bonds
payable in whole or in part from tax revenues under this chapter or section 12
of this act; and

(4) Only one of the
following taxes may be appropriated under this chapter:

(a) The local retail
sales and use tax offset imposed under section 12 of this act; or

(b) The incremental
increase in excise taxes in an apportionment district approved under this
chapter.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
4. (1)(a) A community
revitalization project may be undertaken and coordinated with other programs or
efforts undertaken by the sponsor or others and may be funded in whole or in
part from sources other than those provided by this chapter.

(b) The sponsor shall
assume all risk if sources authorized by this chapter are not adequate to fund
the community revitalization project.

(2) A sponsor may
contract with a nonprofit business association operating within the boundaries
of the apportionment district or a parking and business improvement area,
created under chapter 35.87A RCW, to administer the community revitalization
project. The administration of the community revitalization project must
comply with all applicable provisions of federal, state, or local law.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
5. In order to establish an
apportionment district and secure an allocation of excise taxes to finance a
community revitalization project:

(1) A sponsor shall
propose by ordinance a plan for the community revitalization project that includes
a description of the contemplated community revitalization project, the
estimated cost of the community revitalization project, the boundaries of the
apportionment district, the estimated period during which tax revenue
apportionment is contemplated, and ways in which the sponsor plans to use tax
allocation revenues to finance the community revitalization project.

(2)(a) At least sixty
days in advance of a public hearing at which the ordinance creating the
apportionment district is first considered, the local government shall deliver
notice of the hearing and the information required in subsection (1) of this
section to the department of community, trade, and economic development and the
department of revenue. The department of revenue shall review the information
and determine whether there is sufficient revenue under the revenue
apportionment cap in section 3 of this act to accommodate the proposed
community revitalization project.

(b) No tax revenue
generated from an apportionment district created under this chapter or section
12 of this act may be used to finance a community revitalization project until
the department of community, trade, and economic development, or a successor
department, has reviewed and approved a feasibility study paid for and
submitted to the department by the sponsor. The department's review process
shall include the following criteria:

(i) The community
revitalization project meets the requirements of this chapter; and

(ii) The feasibility
study demonstrates that:

(A) There is a
reasonable likelihood that the present value return to the various taxing
districts is in excess of forgone tax revenue as a result of the community
revitalization project, using a discounted rate equal to the then current state
borrowing rate;

(B) The community
revitalization project is not feasible without the tax revenue generated from
the apportionment district;

(C) The expected tax
revenue generated from the apportionment district is likely to be sufficient to
finance that portion of the public sources necessary to finance the community
revitalization project;

(D) The community
revitalization project will reasonably be expected to cause private investment
within the apportionment district that probably would not have occurred without
financing of the community revitalization project;

(E) The community
revitalization project will result in a net increase in employment within the
apportionment district; and

(F) There is sufficient
management capacity and expertise of the organization responsible for the
management of the community revitalization project; and

(iii) Other factors the
department deems necessary to safeguard the state's contribution of tax revenue
into the community revitalization project.

(3) The department of
revenue and the department of community, trade, and economic development shall
notify the sponsoring local government, and either the county legislative
authority or, in a charter county, the county executive, of the results of the
evaluation of the project at least fifteen days in advance of the public
hearing required in subsection (1) of this section.

(4) If there are more
projects proposed than apportioned revenue is available in a given year under
the limit in section 3 of this act, the department of community, trade, and
economic development shall establish rules to determine how the available
revenue will be allocated among qualified projects.

(5) At the time and
place fixed for the hearing under subsection (2) of this section, and at such
times the hearing may be adjourned, a sponsor shall receive and consider all
statements and materials as might be submitted, and objections and letters
filed before and within ten days after the hearing. Any time during the
process leading to the establishment of the apportionment district, the county
legislative authority may notify the sponsor that it does not wish to
participate in the district, and upon such notification all taxes due the
county from the apportionment district shall remain the county's and may not be
used for the community revitalization project without separate county approval.

(6) Within one hundred
twenty days after completion of the public hearing, a sponsor shall pass an
ordinance establishing the apportionment district and authorizing the proposed
community revitalization project, including any modifications that in the
sponsor's opinion the hearing indicated should be made, that includes the
boundaries of the apportionment district, a description of the community
revitalization project, the estimated cost of the community revitalization
project, the method used to finance the state's portion of the community
revitalization project under section 3 of this act, the portion of the
estimated cost of the community revitalization project to be paid from tax
allocation revenues, the estimated time during which the taxes are to be
apportioned, the date when the apportionment of taxes is to commence, and a
finding that the community revitalization project meets the conditions in
section 3 of this act and this section.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
6. (1) Except as provided in
subsection (5) of this section, upon the date established in the community
revitalization project ordinance, but not sooner than the first day of the
calendar year following the passage of the ordinance, the department shall
allocate and pay to the sponsor, or the sponsor's designated agent, until all
community revitalization project costs to be paid from the tax allocation
revenues have been paid, the following amounts:

(a) That portion of the
tax levied in each year under chapter 82.08 or 82.12 RCW upon any retail sale
or any use of an article of tangible personal property within an apportionment
district that is in excess of the tax imposed under chapter 82.08 or 82.12 RCW
on sales or uses within the apportionment district in the year preceding the
formation of the apportionment district;

(b) That portion of the
tax levied in each year under RCW 82.14.030 upon any retail sale or any use of
an article of tangible personal property within an apportionment district that
is in excess of the tax imposed under RCW 82.14.030 on sales or uses within the
apportionment district in the year preceding the formation of the apportionment
district, less any amounts that the department is entitled to retain as
provided in RCW 82.14.050 for administration and collection expenses incurred
by the department.

(2) The date upon which
the apportionment district was established is considered the date that the
community revitalization project ordinance was enacted by the sponsor.

(3) The apportionment
of taxes under this section must cease when the tax allocation revenues are no
longer necessary or obligated to pay community revitalization project costs or
to pay principal and interest on bonds issued to finance community
revitalization project costs to which tax allocation revenues are pledged. At
the time of termination of the apportionment, any excess money and any earnings
held by the sponsor must be distributed to the taxing districts that were
subject to the allocation in proportion to their tax receipts due for the year
in which the funds are returned.

(4) The amount of taxes
determined to be collected in the year preceding the formation of the
apportionment district shall be adjusted upward or downward to reflect
increases or decreases in the rate of taxation to determine the amount of
excess taxes to be apportioned in accordance with subsection (1)(b) of this
section.

(5) The sponsor may
agree to receive less than the full amount provided in subsection (1) of this
section, in which case the department shall distribute the balance to the
respective taxing districts in accordance with law in the same manner as if
this section did not exist.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
7. (1) Tax allocation
revenues may be applied as follows:

(a) To pay community
revitalization costs;

(b) To pay into bond
redemption funds established to pay the principal and interest on general
obligation bonds issued to finance a community revitalization project that is
specified in the community revitalization project ordinance and constructed
following the establishment of the apportionment district; or

(c) To pay any
combination of (a) and (b) of this subsection.

(2) Tax allocation
revenues may be pledged to the payment of bonds issued to finance a community
revitalization project.

(3) No city may lower
their tax rates after the creation of an apportionment district and using tax
allocation revenues to finance a community revitalization project.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
8. The department of
community, trade, and economic development, in consultation with the department
of revenue, shall submit an annual report to appropriate legislative committees
on the amount of tax revenue allocated to local governments under the community
revitalization financing program created in this act. The report shall also
contain information on: (1) The number, description, and location of requests
for community revitalization projects, (2) the number of community
revitalization projects approved by the department, and (3) an evaluation of
how the community revitalization project is meeting criteria of the feasibility
study required in section 5 of this act.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
9. This chapter supplements
and neither restricts nor limits any powers that the state or any municipal
corporation might otherwise have under laws of this state.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
10. The authority to
establish an apportionment district under this chapter expires July 1, 2009.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
11. This chapter may be known
and cited as the community revitalization financing act.

PART II‑-SALES
AND USE TAX DEDUCTION FOR

COMMUNITY REVITALIZATION
PROJECTS

NEW SECTION. Sec.
12. A new section is added
to chapter 82.14 RCW to read as follows:

(1)(a) The legislative
authority of a city located in a county with population densities between one
hundred and one and three hundred and ninety-nine may impose a sales and use
tax in accordance with terms of this chapter. The tax is in addition to other
taxes authorized by law and shall be collected from those persons who are
taxable by the state under chapters 82.08 and 82.12 RCW upon the occurrence of
any taxable event within the city. The rate of tax shall not exceed 0.033
percent of the selling price in the case of a sales tax or value of the article
used in the case of a use tax.

(b) The legislative
authority of a city located in a county with population densities between four
hundred and six hundred and ninety-nine may impose a sales and use tax in
accordance with the terms of this chapter. The tax is in addition to other
taxes authorized by law and shall be collected from those persons who are
taxable by the state under chapters 82.08 and 82.12 RCW upon the occurrence of
any taxable event within the city. The rate of tax shall not exceed 0.025
percent of the selling price in the case of a sales tax or value of the article
used in the case of a use tax.

(c) The legislative
authority of a city located in a county with population densities greater than
seven hundred may impose a sales and use tax in accordance with the terms of
this chapter. The tax is in addition to other taxes authorized by law and
shall be collected from those persons who are taxable by the state under
chapters 82.08 and 82.12 RCW upon the occurrence of any taxable event within
the city. The rate of tax shall not exceed 0.017 percent of the selling price
in the case of a sales tax or value of the article used in the case of a use
tax.

(2) The tax imposed
under subsection (1) of this section shall be deducted from the amount of tax
otherwise required to be collected or paid over to the department of revenue
under chapter 82.08 or 82.12 RCW. The department of revenue shall perform the
collection of the taxes on behalf of the county at no cost to the county.

(3) Moneys collected
under this section shall only be used as the state's contribution toward the
financing of a community revitalization project under chapter 82.-- RCW
(sections 1 through 11 of this act). Only those community revitalization
projects approved under section 5 of this act may be financed with moneys
collected under this section.

(4) No tax may be
collected under this section before July 1, 2002. No tax may be collected
under this section by a city more than twenty-five years after the date that a
tax is first imposed under this section.

(5) For purposes of
this section, "population density" means the number of persons per
square mile as determined by the office of financial management and published
each year by the department of community, trade, and economic development for the
period July 1st to June 30th.

PART III‑-MISCELLANEOUS

Sec. 13. RCW 35.87A.010 and 2000
c 201 s 1 are each amended to read as follows:

To aid general economic
development and neighborhood revitalization, and to facilitate the cooperation
of merchants, businesses, and residential property owners which assists trade,
economic viability, and liveability, the legislature hereby authorizes all counties
and all incorporated cities and towns, including unclassified cities and towns
operating under special charters:

(1) To establish, after
a petition submitted by the operators responsible for sixty percent of the
assessments by businesses and multifamily residential or mixed-use projects
within the area, parking and business improvement areas, hereafter referred to
as area or areas, for the following purposes:

(a) The acquisition,
construction or maintenance of parking facilities for the benefit of the area;

(b) Decoration of any
public place in the area;

(c) Sponsorship or
promotion of public events which are to take place on or in public places in
the area;

(d) Furnishing of music
in any public place in the area;

(e) Providing
professional management, planning, and promotion for the area, including the
management and promotion of retail trade activities in the area; or

(f) Providing
maintenance and security for common, public areas.

(2) To levy special
assessments on all businesses and multifamily residential or mixed-use projects
within the area and specially benefited by a parking and business improvement
area to pay in whole or in part the damages or costs incurred therein as
provided in this chapter.

(3) To enter into
agreements with a legislative authority to administer community revitalization
projects within an apportionment district established under sections 1 through
11 of this act.

Sec. 14. RCW 82.14.050 and 1999 c
165 s 14 are each amended to read as follows:

The counties, cities,
and transportation authorities under RCW 82.14.045 and public facilities
districts under chapter 36.100 and 35.57 RCW shall contract, prior to the
effective date of a resolution or ordinance imposing a sales and use tax, the
administration and collection to the state department of revenue, which shall
deduct a percentage amount, as provided by contract, not to exceed two percent
of the taxes collected for administration and collection expenses incurred by
the department. Except as provided in section 6 of this act, the
remainder of any portion of any tax authorized by this chapter which is
collected by the department of revenue shall be deposited by the state
department of revenue in the local sales and use tax account hereby created in
the state treasury. Moneys in the local sales and use tax account may be spent
only for distribution to counties, cities, transportation authorities, and
public facilities districts imposing a sales and use tax. All administrative
provisions in chapters 82.03, 82.08, 82.12, and 82.32 RCW, as they now exist or
may hereafter be amended, shall, insofar as they are applicable to state sales
and use taxes, be applicable to taxes imposed pursuant to this chapter. Except
as provided in RCW 43.08.190, all earnings of investments of balances in the
local sales and use tax account shall be credited to the local sales and use
tax account and distributed to the counties, cities, transportation
authorities, and public facilities districts monthly.

Sec. 15. RCW 35.80.030 and 1989 c
133 s 3 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) Whenever the local
governing body of a municipality finds that one or more conditions of the
character described in RCW 35.80.010 exist within its territorial limits, said
governing body may adopt ordinances relating to such dwellings, buildings, structures,
or premises. Such ordinances may provide for the following:

(a) That an
"improvement board" or officer be designated or appointed to exercise
the powers assigned to such board or officer by the ordinance as specified
herein. Said board or officer may be an existing municipal board or officer in
the municipality, or may be a separate board or officer appointed solely for
the purpose of exercising the powers assigned by said ordinance.

If a board is created,
the ordinance shall specify the terms, method of appointment, and type of
membership of said board, which may be limited, if the local governing body
chooses, to public officers as herein defined.

(b) If a board is
created, a public officer, other than a member of the improvement board, may be
designated to work with the board and carry out the duties and exercise the
powers assigned to said public officer by the ordinance.

(c) That if, after a
preliminary investigation of any dwelling, building, structure, or premises,
the board or officer finds that it is unfit for human habitation or other use,
he shall cause to be served either personally or by certified mail, with return
receipt requested, upon all persons having any interest therein, as shown upon
the records of the auditor's office of the county in which such property is
located, and shall post in a conspicuous place on such property, a complaint
stating in what respects such dwelling, building, structure, or premises is
unfit for human habitation or other use. If the whereabouts of any of such
persons is unknown and the same cannot be ascertained by the board or officer
in the exercise of reasonable diligence, and the board or officer makes an
affidavit to that effect, then the serving of such complaint or order upon such
persons may be made either by personal service or by mailing a copy of the
complaint and order by certified mail, postage prepaid, return receipt
requested, to each such person at the address of the building involved in the
proceedings, and mailing a copy of the complaint and order by first class mail
to any address of each such person in the records of the county assessor or the
county auditor for the county where the property is located. Such complaint
shall contain a notice that a hearing will be held before the board or officer,
at a place therein fixed, not less than ten days nor more than thirty days
after the serving of said complaint; and that all parties in interest shall be
given the right to file an answer to the complaint, to appear in person, or
otherwise, and to give testimony at the time and place in the complaint. The
rules of evidence prevailing in courts of law or equity shall not be
controlling in hearings before the board or officer. A copy of such complaint
shall also be filed with the auditor of the county in which the dwelling,
building, structure, or ((premise [premises])) premises is
located, and such filing of the complaint or order shall have the same force
and effect as other lis pendens notices provided by law.

(d) That the board or
officer may determine that a dwelling, building, structure, or premises is
unfit for human habitation or other use if it finds that conditions exist in
such dwelling, building, structure, or premises which are dangerous or
injurious to the health or safety of the occupants of such dwelling, building,
structure, or premises, the occupants of neighboring dwellings, or other
residents of such municipality. Such conditions may include the following,
without limitations: Defects therein increasing the hazards of fire or
accident; inadequate ventilation, light, or sanitary facilities, dilapidation,
disrepair, structural defects, uncleanliness, overcrowding, or inadequate
drainage. The ordinance shall state reasonable and minimum standards covering
such conditions, including those contained in ordinances adopted in accordance
with ((subdivision)) subsection (7)(a) ((herein)) of
this section, to guide the board or the public officer and the agents and
employees of either, in determining the fitness of a dwelling for human habitation,
or building, structure, or premises for other use.

(e) That the
determination of whether a dwelling, building, structure, or premises should be
repaired or demolished, shall be based on specific stated standards on (i) the
degree of structural deterioration of the dwelling, building, structure, or
premises, or (ii) the relationship that the estimated cost of repair bears to
the value of the dwelling, building, structure, or premises, with the method of
determining this value to be specified in the ordinance.

(f) That if, after the
required hearing, the board or officer determines that the dwelling is unfit
for human habitation, or building or structure or premises is unfit for other
use, it shall state in writing its findings of fact in support of such
determination, and shall issue and cause to be served upon the owner or party
in interest thereof, as is provided in ((subdivision (1)))(c) of this
subsection, and shall post in a conspicuous place on said property, an
order which (i) requires the owner or party in interest, within the time
specified in the order, to repair, alter, or improve such dwelling, building,
structure, or premises to render it fit for human habitation, or for other use,
or to vacate and close the dwelling, building, structure, or premises, if such
course of action is deemed proper on the basis of the standards set forth as
required in ((subdivision (1)))(e) of this subsection; or (ii)
requires the owner or party in interest, within the time specified in the
order, to remove or demolish such dwelling, building, structure, or premises,
if this course of action is deemed proper on the basis of said standards. If
no appeal is filed, a copy of such order shall be filed with the auditor of the
county in which the dwelling, building, structure, or premises is located.

(g) The owner or any
party in interest, within thirty days from the date of service upon the owner
and posting of an order issued by the board under the provisions of ((subdivision))
(c) of this subsection, may file an appeal with the appeals commission.

The local governing
body of the municipality shall designate or establish a municipal agency to
serve as the appeals commission. The local governing body shall also establish
rules of procedure adequate to assure a prompt and thorough review of matters
submitted to the appeals commission, and such rules of procedure shall include
the following, without being limited thereto: (i) All matters submitted to the
appeals commission must be resolved by the commission within sixty days from
the date of filing therewith and (ii) a transcript of the findings of fact of
the appeals commission shall be made available to the owner or other party in
interest upon demand.

The findings and orders
of the appeals commission shall be reported in the same manner and shall bear
the same legal consequences as if issued by the board, and shall be subject to
review only in the manner and to the extent provided in ((subdivision)) subsection
(2) of this section.

If the owner or party
in interest, following exhaustion of his rights to appeal, fails to comply with
the final order to repair, alter, improve, vacate, close, remove, or demolish
the dwelling, building, structure, or premises, the board or officer may direct
or cause such dwelling, building, structure, or premises to be repaired,
altered, improved, vacated, and closed, removed, or demolished.

(h) That the amount of
the cost of such repairs, alterations or improvements; or vacating and closing;
or removal or demolition by the board or officer, shall be assessed against the
real property upon which such cost was incurred unless such amount is
previously paid. Upon certification to him by the treasurer of the
municipality in cases arising out of the city or town or by the county improvement
board or officer, in cases arising out of the county, of the assessment amount
being due and owing, the county treasurer shall enter the amount of such
assessment upon the tax rolls against the property for the current year and the
same shall become a part of the general taxes for that year to be collected at
the same time and with interest at such rates and in such manner as provided
for in RCW 84.56.020, as now or hereafter amended, for delinquent taxes, and
when collected to be deposited to the credit of the general fund of the
municipality. If the dwelling, building, structure, or premises is removed or
demolished by the board or officer, the board or officer shall, if possible,
sell the materials of such dwelling, building, structure, (([or])) or
premises in accordance with procedures set forth in said ordinance, and shall
credit the proceeds of such sale against the cost of the removal or demolition
and if there be any balance remaining, it shall be paid to the parties entitled
thereto, as determined by the board or officer, after deducting the costs
incident thereto.

The assessment shall
constitute a lien against the property which shall be of equal rank with state,
county, and municipal taxes and shall have a first priority and shall
be paid before the payment of other state, county, and municipal taxes from any
tax payments collected or the proceeds of any sale of the property through
foreclosure or sale by the county including, but not limited to, the proceeds
of sales of any property acquired by the county by tax deed.

(2) Any person affected
by an order issued by the appeals commission pursuant to ((subdivision))
subsection (1)(f) ((hereof)) of this section may, within
thirty days after the posting and service of the order, petition to the superior
court for an injunction restraining the public officer or members of the board
from carrying out the provisions of the order. In all such proceedings the
court is authorized to affirm, reverse, or modify the order and such trial
shall be heard de novo.

(3) An ordinance
adopted by the local governing body of the municipality may authorize the board
or officer to exercise such powers as may be necessary or convenient to carry
out and effectuate the purposes and provisions of this section. These powers
shall include the following in addition to others herein granted: (a)(i) To
determine which dwellings within the municipality are unfit for human
habitation; (ii) to determine which buildings, structures, or premises are
unfit for other use; (b) to administer oaths and affirmations, examine
witnesses and receive evidence; and (c) to investigate the dwelling and other
property conditions in the municipality or county and to enter upon premises
for the purpose of making examinations when the board or officer has reasonable
ground for believing they are unfit for human habitation, or for other use:
PROVIDED, That such entries shall be made in such manner as to cause the least
possible inconvenience to the persons in possession, and to obtain an order for
this purpose after submitting evidence in support of an application which is
adequate to justify such an order from a court of competent jurisdiction in the
event entry is denied or resisted.

(4) The local governing
body of any municipality adopting an ordinance pursuant to this chapter may
appropriate the necessary funds to administer such ordinance.

(5) Nothing in this
section shall be construed to abrogate or impair the powers of the courts or of
any department of any municipality to enforce any provisions of its charter or
its ordinances or regulations, nor to prevent or punish violations thereof; and
the powers conferred by this section shall be in addition and supplemental to
the powers conferred by any other law.

(6) Nothing in this
section shall be construed to impair or limit in any way the power of the
municipality to define and declare nuisances and to cause their removal or
abatement, by summary proceedings or otherwise.

(7) Any municipality
may (by ordinance adopted by its governing body) (a) prescribe minimum
standards for the use and occupancy of dwellings throughout the municipality,
or county, (b) prescribe minimum standards for the use or occupancy of any
building, structure, or premises used for any other purpose, (c) prevent the
use or occupancy of any dwelling, building, structure, or premises, which is
injurious to the public health, safety, morals, or welfare, and (d) prescribe
punishment for the violation of any provision of such ordinance.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
16. A new section is added
to chapter 35.80 RCW to read as follows:

(1) The municipality,
as an alternative or additional remedy, may acquire by negotiation the
substandard building, structure, or premises and the land on which it is
located, and after the acquisition may utilize public or other available funds
to improve the property acquired and the property may be used or transferred,
as authorized under chapter 35.80A RCW, as if the property were acquired under
RCW 35.80A.010, if the owner or the owner's representative notifies the
municipality in writing that the owner refuses or is unable to proceed or fails
to: (a) Repair, alter, or improve a substandard building, structure, or
premises; or (b) remove or demolish a substandard building, structure, or
premises as required by the order of the board or officer under RCW 35.80.030.

(2) If the substandard
building to be acquired is part of a community revitalization project, the
municipality may acquire property adjacent to the substandard building, as
necessary to provide for the implementation of the approved community revitalization
project, upon a finding by resolution of the local governing body that the
acquisition is necessary in order to cure the problems associated with the
substandard building or buildings, and that redevelopment of the site is not
feasible unless the adjacent property is acquired. This subsection provides
supplemental and alternative authority for acquisition of property by a
municipality.

(3)(a) If the owner of
a substandard building presents evidence satisfactory to the municipality that
the owner does not have available sufficient funds or is unable to obtain
financing on reasonable terms to repair, alter, or improve a substandard
building as required by the order of the board or officer, under RCW 35.80.030,
and in a manner that will place the substandard building in a condition that
will cure the functional obsolescence of the building for its intended use,
then the municipality may, through its local governing body, approve a project
agreement with the owner that may provide for:

(i) Repair,
alterations, and improvement of the substandard building so as to comply with
the order of the board or officer, under RCW 35.80.030, and with the terms and
conditions of the project agreement;

(ii) The manner in
which work under the project agreement will be accomplished and how payment
will be made, that may include, but is not limited to, work let by the
municipality and payment by the municipality for work completed on the
substandard building in accordance with the project agreement; and

(iii) Repayment by the
owner of the costs incurred by the municipality under the project agreement
which repayment may be made in installments with interest on the unpaid portion
as fixed by the local legislative body or paid in such other manner as may be
provided in the project agreement.

(b) If not otherwise
provided in the project agreement, the amount of costs incurred by the
municipality in accordance with the project agreement must be treated as if it
were an assessment on an approved final assessment roll for improvements
constructed within a local improvement district, under chapter 35.44 RCW, and
the costs shall be a lien on the property improved, in the same manner and to
the same extent as a local improvement district assessment lien, and shall be
collected in the same manner as assessments, installment payments, interest,
and penalties are collected under chapter 35.49 RCW.

(c) The project
agreement may provide that the lien for the repayment of all or a portion of
the costs incurred by the municipality under the project agreement may be
subordinated to a deed of trust securing the loan of private funds to the owner
for payment of project costs incurred by the owner under the project agreement.

(4) The municipality or
a public corporation created by a municipality under RCW 35.21.660 or 35.21.730
may provide for the payment of the costs and expenses incurred by the
municipality under a project agreement by revenue or general obligation bonds
or notes payable in whole or in part from the repayment of project costs by
owners and through enforcement of the assessments against the property
benefited or from any other federal, public, or private funds that may be made
available for such purposes.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
17. Sections 1 through 11 of
this act constitute a new chapter in Title 82 RCW.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
18. Part headings as used in
this act do not constitute any part of the law.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 19. If any provision of this
act or its application to any person or circumstance is held invalid, the
remainder of the act or the application of the provision to other persons or
circumstances is not affected.

---
END ---