BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF
WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1. RCW 74.39A.005 and 2000
c 121 s 9 are each amended to read as follows:

The legislature finds
that the aging of the population and advanced medical technology have resulted
in a growing number of persons who require assistance. The primary resource
for long-term care continues to be family and friends. However, these
traditional caregivers are increasingly employed outside the home. There is a
growing demand for improvement and expansion of home and community-based
long-term care services to support and complement the services provided by
these informal caregivers.

The legislature further
finds that the public interest would best be served by a broad array of
long-term care services that support persons who need such services at home or
in the community whenever practicable and that promote individual autonomy,
dignity, and choice.

The legislature finds
that as other long-term care options become more available, the relative need
for nursing home beds is likely to decline. The legislature recognizes, however,
that nursing home care will continue to be a critical part of the state's
long-term care options, and that such services should promote individual
dignity, autonomy, and a homelike environment.

The legislature finds
that many recipients of in-home services are vulnerable and their health and
well-being are dependent on their caregivers. The quality, skills, and
knowledge of their caregivers are often the key to good care. The legislature
finds that the need for well-trained caregivers is growing as the state's
population ages and clients' needs increase. The legislature intends that
current training standards be enhanced.

The legislature
finds that quality care cannot be assured by state mandates alone. Sufficient
resources must be dedicated to long-term care services to facilitate
competitive salaries that will attract and retain quality caregivers. The
legislature recognizes that past failure to provide such resources has
contributed to caregiver recruitment and retention problems in all long-term
care settings. These problems can only degrade the continuity and quality of
care for those persons dependent upon such care.

The legislature
finds that state government has assumed the responsibility of purchasing
long-term care services for a large proportion of those receiving such
services. The legislature further finds that to ensure that state government's
expectations concerning the quality of long-term care services are met, its
payments for those services should be fair and reasonable and adequately
compensate the current costs incurred in providing those services.

Sec. 2. RCW 74.39A.009 and 1997
c 392 s 103 are each amended to read as follows:

Unless the context
clearly requires otherwise, the definitions in this section apply throughout
this chapter.

(1) "Adult family
home" means a home licensed under chapter 70.128 RCW.

(2) "Adult
residential care services" means services provided by a boarding
home that is licensed under chapter 18.20 RCW and that has a contract with the
department under RCW 74.39A.020.

(3) "Assisted
living services" means services provided by a boarding home that has a
contract with the department under RCW 74.39A.010 and the resident is housed in
a private apartment-like unit.

(4) "Boarding
home" means a facility licensed under chapter 18.20 RCW.

(5)
"Cost-effective care" means care provided, in conformity with
applicable laws, rules, regulations, and expectations of the state and federal
governments, in a setting of an individual's choice that is necessary to
promote the ((most appropriate)) highest practicable level of
physical, mental, and psychosocial well-being consistent with client choice, in
an environment that is appropriate to the care and safety needs of the
individual, and such care cannot be provided at a lower cost in any other
setting. But this in no way precludes an individual from choosing a different
residential setting to achieve his or her desired quality of life.

(6)
"Department" means the department of social and health services.

(7) "Enhanced
adult residential care services" means services provided by a
boarding home that is licensed under chapter 18.20 RCW and that has a contract
with the department under RCW 74.39A.010.

(8) "Functionally
disabled person" is synonymous with chronic functionally disabled and
means a person who because of a recognized chronic physical or mental condition
or disease, including chemical dependency, is impaired to the extent of being
dependent upon others for direct care, support, supervision, or monitoring to
perform activities of daily living. "Activities of daily living", in
this context, means self-care abilities related to personal care such as
bathing, eating, using the toilet, dressing, and transfer. Instrumental
activities of daily living may also be used to assess a person's functional
abilities as they are related to the mental capacity to perform activities in
the home and the community such as cooking, shopping, house cleaning, doing
laundry, working, and managing personal finances.

(9) "Home and
community services" means adult family homes, in-home services, adult
day services, and other services administered or provided by contract by
the department directly or through contract with area agencies on aging or
similar services provided by facilities and agencies licensed by the
department.

(10) "Long-term
care" is synonymous with chronic care and means care and supports
delivered indefinitely, intermittently, or over a sustained time to persons of
any age disabled by chronic mental or physical illness, disease, chemical
dependency, or a medical condition that is permanent, not reversible or
curable, or is long-lasting and severely limits their mental or physical
capacity for self-care. The use of this definition is not intended to expand
the scope of services, care, or assistance by any individuals, groups,
residential care settings, or professions unless otherwise expressed by law.

(11) "Nursing
home" means a facility licensed under chapter 18.51 RCW.

(12) "Nursing
home services" means services provided by a nursing home that has a
contract with the department under chapter 74.46 RCW.

(13)
"Secretary" means the secretary of social and health services.

(((13))) (14)
"Tribally licensed boarding home" means a boarding home licensed by a
federally recognized Indian tribe which home provides services similar to
boarding homes licensed under chapter 18.20 RCW.

Sec. 3. RCW 74.39A.030 and 2002
c 3 s 10 (Initiative Measure No. 775) are each amended to read as follows:

(1) To the extent of
available funding, the department shall expand cost-effective options for home
and community services for consumers for whom the state participates in the
cost of their care.

(2) In expanding home
and community services, the department shall: (a) Take full advantage of
federal funding available under Title XVIII and Title XIX of the federal social
security act, including home health, adult day ((care)) services,
waiver options, and state plan services; and (b) be authorized to use funds
available under its community options program entry system waiver granted under
section 1915(c) of the federal social security act to expand the availability
of in-home, adult residential care, adult family homes, enhanced adult
residential care, and assisted living services. By June 30, 1997, the
department shall undertake to reduce the nursing home medicaid census by at
least one thousand six hundred by assisting individuals who would otherwise
require nursing facility services to obtain services of their choice, including
assisted living services, enhanced adult residential care, and other home and
community services. If a resident, or his or her legal representative, objects
to a discharge decision initiated by the department, the resident shall not be
discharged if the resident has been assessed and determined to require nursing
facility services. In contracting with nursing homes and boarding homes for
enhanced adult residential care placements, the department shall not require,
by contract or through other means, structural modifications to existing
building construction.

(3)(a) The department
shall by rule establish payment rates for home and community services ((that)),
adult and enhanced adult residential care services, assisted living services,
and nursing home services, that are fair and reasonable and adequately pay for
current costs incurred to support the provision of cost-effective care and
services. In the event of any conflict between any such rule and a
collective bargaining agreement entered into under RCW 74.39A.270 and
74.39A.300, the collective bargaining agreement prevails.

(b) The department may
authorize an enhanced adult residential care rate for nursing homes that
temporarily or permanently convert their bed use for the purpose of providing
enhanced adult residential care under chapter 70.38 RCW, when the department
determines that payment of an enhanced rate is cost-effective and necessary to
foster expansion of contracted enhanced adult residential care services. As an
incentive for nursing homes to permanently convert a portion of its nursing
home bed capacity for the purpose of providing enhanced adult residential care,
the department may authorize a supplemental add-on to the enhanced adult
residential care rate.

(c) The department may
authorize a supplemental assisted living services rate for up to four years for
facilities that convert from nursing home use and do not retain rights to the
converted nursing home beds under chapter 70.38 RCW, if the department
determines that payment of a supplemental rate is cost-effective and necessary
to foster expansion of contracted assisted living services.

Sec. 4. RCW 74.46.190 and 1998 c
322 s 11 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) The substance of a
transaction will prevail over its form.

(2) All documented
costs which are ordinary, necessary, related to care of medical care
recipients, and not expressly unallowable under this chapter ((or department
rule)), are to be allowable and will be fully reimbursed by the
department. Costs of providing therapy care are allowable, subject to any
applicable limit contained in this chapter, provided documentation establishes
the costs were incurred for medical care recipients and other sources of
payment to which recipients may be legally entitled, such as private insurance
or medicare, were first fully utilized.

(3) The payment for
property usage is to be independent of ownership structure and financing
arrangements.

(4) Allowable costs
shall not include costs reported by a contractor for a prior period to the
extent such costs, due to statutory exemption, will not be incurred by the
nursing facility in the period to be covered by the rate.

(5) Any costs deemed
allowable under this chapter are subject to the provisions of RCW 74.46.421.
((The allowability of a cost shall not be construed as creating a legal
right or entitlement to reimbursement of the cost.))

NEW SECTION. Sec.
5. This act may be known and
cited as the Washington long-term care quality act.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 6. This act takes effect
July 1, 2003.

---
END ---