BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF
WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec.
1. It is the intent of the
legislature to articulate the responsibilities of the pension oversight board
and to further the study of issues in the state retirement systems. It is also
the intent of the legislature to improve upon the coordination of and the
reports from the department of retirement systems, the state investment board,
and the office of the state actuary to make them more concise and
user-friendly, to further the disclosure of the financial and actuarial status
of the systems, and to empower interested parties in assessing accountability.

Sec. 2. RCW 41.50.075 and 2000 c
247 s 601 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) Two funds are
hereby created and established in the state treasury to be known as the Washington
law enforcement officers' and fire fighters' system plan 1 retirement fund, and
the Washington law enforcement officers' and fire fighters' system plan 2
retirement fund which shall consist of all moneys paid into them in accordance
with the provisions of this chapter and chapter 41.26 RCW, whether such moneys
take the form of cash, securities, or other assets. The plan 1 fund shall
consist of all moneys paid to finance the benefits provided to members of the
law enforcement officers' and fire fighters' retirement system plan 1, and the
plan 2 fund shall consist of all moneys paid to finance the benefits provided
to members of the law enforcement officers' and fire fighters' retirement
system plan 2.

(2) All of the assets
of the Washington state teachers' retirement system shall be credited according
to the purposes for which they are held, to two funds to be maintained in the
state treasury, namely, the teachers' retirement system plan 1 fund and the
teachers' retirement system combined plan 2 and 3 fund. The plan 1 fund shall
consist of all moneys paid to finance the benefits provided to members of the
Washington state teachers' retirement system plan 1, and the combined plan 2
and 3 fund shall consist of all moneys paid to finance the benefits provided to
members of the Washington state teachers' retirement system plan 2 and 3.

(3) There is hereby
established in the state treasury two separate funds, namely the public
employees' retirement system plan 1 fund and the public employees' retirement
system combined plan 2 and plan 3 fund. The plan 1 fund shall consist of all
moneys paid to finance the benefits provided to members of the public
employees' retirement system plan 1, and the combined plan 2 and plan 3 fund
shall consist of all moneys paid to finance the benefits provided to members of
the public employees' retirement system plans 2 and 3.

(4) There is hereby
established in the state treasury the school employees' retirement system
combined plan 2 and 3 fund. The combined plan 2 and 3 fund shall consist of
all moneys paid to finance the benefits provided to members of the school
employees' retirement system plan 2 and plan 3.

(5) The legislature
shall expend from the funds created in this section only to satisfy the
liabilities, if any, of each of the respective systems.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
3. A new section is added
to chapter 41.50 RCW to read as follows:

(1)(a) The state
pension oversight board is created and consists of the following members:

(i) Four active members
or representatives from organizations of active members of the state retirement
system appointed by the governor for staggered three-year terms;

(ii) Four retired
members or representatives of retired members' organizations of the state
retirement system appointed by the governor for staggered three-year terms,
with no two members from the same system;

(iii) Five employer
representatives appointed by the governor for staggered three-year terms;

(iv) The director of
the department, the director of financial management, and the executive
director of the state investment board; and

(v) Four members of the
legislature, with one member representing each of the two largest caucuses in
the senate and the house of representatives, appointed by the president of the
senate and the speaker of the house of representatives. The legislators shall
be nonvoting members of the board.

(b) The board shall
establish policies and procedures for its internal management.

(2) The board shall
provide open and balanced review of pension policy issues and advise and
recommend changes on pension policy issues; contribution rates; long-term
assumptions used in developing those rates; and legislation to the legislature,
the governor, the pension funding council, and the joint committee on pension
policy.

(3) The board shall
from time to time make written recommendations to the legislature concerning
deficiencies, conflicts, or obsolete provisions in, and need for reorganization
or revision of, the statutes governing pension policy, and shall prepare for
submission to the legislature, legislation for the correction or removal of
those deficiencies, conflicts, or obsolete provisions, or to otherwise improve
the form or substance of any portion of the statute law of this state as the
public interest or the administration of pension policy may require.

(4) The board shall
discharge its duties in the interest of the public employers, participants, and
beneficiaries.

(5) The department
shall provide staff and actuarial services to the board.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
4. A new section is added
to chapter 41.50 RCW to read as follows:

The department is to
produce a summary level and consolidated annual financial report with the focus
of presenting information about the status of the various retirement plans to
active and retired members, policy makers, and other interested parties. Information
included in the report is to be provided by the office of the state actuary,
the state investment board, and the department. The department shall consult
with the state investment board and the office of the state actuary during the
preparation of this report. The department shall meet with the department's
advisory board in order to ensure the usability of the report. In addition,
the department shall give annual notice of report review and then accept and
consider input on the style and substance of the report from interested
parties.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
5. A new section is added
to chapter 41.50 RCW to read as follows:

Beginning in 2003 and
every four years thereafter, the department shall convene a task force comprised
of representatives of the department, the office of the state actuary, the
state investment board, the office of financial management, the office of the
state auditor, and the advisory committee to the department. This task force
shall review all the major reports prepared by state agencies concerning the
state retirement systems and examine the best practices from other states. The
goals of the task force are to determine what information needs to be reported
and to seek ways to: Promote more effective monitoring of the public
retirement systems, streamline reporting, become more efficient in the
production and distribution of the information, minimize redundancies and
confusion, and maximize the public's investment in these reports. The task force
shall report by the end of October in each year the task force is convened to
the state pension oversight board with their recommendations for changing and
consolidating these reports. Any changes in current state law that may be
required to accomplish these recommendations shall be noted.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 6. If any provision of this
act or its application to any person or circumstance is held invalid, the
remainder of the act or the application of the provision to other persons or
circumstances is not affected.

---
END ---