BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF
WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec.
1. OVERVIEW. The law enforcement
officers' and fire fighters' retirement system plan 2 is currently managed by
the legislature's joint committee on pension policy with ratification by the
members of the legislature and is administered by the department of retirement
systems.

Members of the plan
have no direct input into the management of their retirement program.
Forty-six other states currently have member representation in their pension
management. This act is intended to give management of the retirement program
to the people whose lives are directly affected by it and who provide loyal and
valiant service to ensure the health, safety, and welfare of the citizens of
the state of Washington.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
2. INTENT. It is the intent
of this act to:

(1) Establish a board
of trustees responsible for the adoption of actuarial standards to be applied
to the plan;

(2) Provide for
additional benefits for fire fighters and law enforcement officers subject to
the cost limitations provided for in this act;

(3) Exercise fiduciary
responsibility in the oversight of those pension management functions assigned
to the board;

(4) Provide effective
monitoring of the plan by providing an annual report to the legislature, to the
members and beneficiaries of the plan, and to the public;

(5) Establish
contribution rates for employees and employers that will guaranty viability of
the plan, subject to the limitations provided for in this act;

(6) Provide for an
annual budget and to pay costs from the trust, as part of the normal cost of
the plan; and

(7) Enable the board of
trustees to retain professional and technical advisors as necessary for the
fulfillment of their statutory responsibilities.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
3. DEFINITIONS. The definitions
in this section apply throughout this act unless the context clearly requires
otherwise.

(1) "Member"
or "beneficiary" means:

(a) Current and future
law enforcement officers and fire fighters who are contributing to the plan;

(b) Retired employees
or their named beneficiaries who receive benefits from the plan; and

(c) Separated vested
members of the plan who are not currently receiving benefits.

(2) "Plan"
means the law enforcement officers' and fire fighters' retirement system plan
2.

(3) "Actuary"
means the actuary employed by the board of trustees.

(4) "State
actuary" means the actuary employed by the department.

(5) "Board"
means the board of trustees.

(6) "Board
member" means a member of the board of trustees.

(7)
"Department" means the department of retirement systems.

(8) "Minimum
benefits" means those benefits provided for in chapter 41.26 RCW as of the
effective date of this act.

(9)
"Employer" means the same as under RCW 41.26.030(2)(b).

(10) "Enrolled actuary"
means an actuary who is enrolled under the employee retirement income security
act of 1974 (Subtitle C of Title III) and who is a member of the society of
actuaries or the American academy of actuaries.

(11) "Increased
benefit" means a benefit in addition to the minimum benefits.

(12) "Trust"
means the assets of the plan.

(13)
"Benefits" means the age or service or combination thereof required
for retirement, the level of service and disability retirement benefits,
survivorship benefits, payment options including a deferred retirement option
plan, average final compensation, postretirement cost of living adjustments,
including health care and the elements of compensation. Benefits does not
include the classifications of employment eligible to participate in the plan.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
4. BOARD OF TRUSTEES CREATED‑-SELECTION
OF TRUSTEES‑‑TERMS OF OFFICE‑‑VACANCIES. (1) An eleven
member board of trustees is hereby created.

(a) Three of the board
members shall be active law enforcement officers who are participants in the
plan. Beginning with the first vacancy on or after January 1, 2007, one board
member shall be a retired law enforcement officer who is a member of the plan.
The law enforcement officer board members shall be appointed by the governor
from a list provided by a recognized statewide council whose membership
consists exclusively of guilds, associations, and unions representing state and
local government law enforcement officers, deputies, and sheriffs and excludes
federal law enforcement officers.

(b) Three of the board
members shall be active fire fighters who are participants in the plan.
Beginning with the first vacancy on or after January 1, 2007, one board member
shall be a retired fire fighter who is a member of the plan. The fire fighter
board member shall be appointed by the governor from a list provided by a
recognized statewide council, affiliated with an international association
representing the interests of fire fighters.

(c) Three of the board
members shall be representatives of employers and shall be appointed by the
governor.

(d) One board member
shall be a member of the house of representatives who is appointed by the
governor based on the recommendation of the speaker of the house of
representatives.

(e) One board member
shall be a member of the senate who is appointed by the governor based on the
recommendation of the majority leader of the senate.

(2) The initial law
enforcement officer and fire fighter board members serve terms of six, four,
and two years, respectively. Thereafter, law enforcement officer and fire
fighter board members serve terms of six years. The remaining board members
serve terms of four years. Board members may be reappointed to succeeding
terms without limitation. Board members shall serve until their successors are
appointed and seated.

(3) In the event of a
vacancy on the board, the vacancy shall be filled in the same manner as
prescribed for an initial appointment.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
5. POWERS OF THE BOARD OF
TRUSTEES‑-MEETING PROCEDURES‑-QUORUM‑-JUDICIAL REVIEW‑-BUDGET
OF THE BOARD OF TRUSTEES. (1) The board of trustees have the following powers
and duties and shall:

(a) Adopt actuarial
tables, assumptions, and cost methodologies in consultation with an enrolled
actuary retained by the board. The state actuary shall provide assistance when
the board requests. The actuary retained by the board shall utilize the
aggregate actuarial cost method, or other recognized actuarial cost method
based on a level percentage of payroll, as that term is employed by the
American academy of actuaries. In determining the reasonableness of actuarial
valuations, assumptions, and cost methodologies, the actuary retained by the
board shall provide a copy of all calculations relied upon to the state
actuary. If the two actuaries concur on the calculations, contributions shall
be made as set forth in the report of the board's actuary. If the two actuaries
cannot agree, they shall appoint a third, independent, enrolled actuary who
shall review the calculations of the actuary retained by the board and the
state actuary. Thereafter, contributions shall be based on the methodology
most closely following that of the third actuary;

(b) Provide for the
design and implementation of increased benefits for members and beneficiaries
of the plan, subject to the contribution limitations under section 6 of this
act. An increased benefit may not be approved by the board until an actuarial
cost of the benefit has been determined by the actuary and contribution rates
adjusted as may be required to maintain the plan on a sound actuarial basis.
Increased benefits as approved by the board shall be presented to the legislature
on January 1st of each year. The increased benefits as approved by the board
shall become effective within ninety days unless not less than two-thirds of
each house of the legislature shall vote to the contrary;

(c) Retain professional
and technical advisors necessary for the accomplishment of its duties. The
cost of these services may be withdrawn from the trust;

(d) Consult with the
department for the purpose of improving benefit administration and member
services;

(e) Provide an annual
report to the governor and the legislature setting forth the actuarial funding
status of the plan and making recommendations for improvements in those aspects
of retirement administration directed by the legislature or administered by the
department;

(f) Establish uniform
administrative rules and operating policies in the manner prescribed by law;

(g) Engage
administrative staff and acquire office space independent of, or in conjunction
with, the department. The department shall provide funding from its budget for
these purposes;

(h) The board shall
publish annually the official plan document comprised of a schedule of
increased benefits and a summary of the minimum benefits established by the
legislature; and

(i) Be the fiduciary of
the plan and discharge the board's duties solely in the interest of the members
and beneficiaries of the plan.

(2) Meetings of the
board of trustees shall be conducted as follows:

(a) All board meetings
are open to the public, preceded by timely public notice;

(b) All actions of the
board shall be taken in open public session, except for those matters which may
be considered in executive session as provided by law;

(c) The board shall
retain minutes of each meeting setting forth the names of those board members
present and absent, and their voting record on any voted issue; and

(d) The board may
establish, with the assistance of the appropriate office of state government,
an internet web site providing for interactive communication with state
government, members and beneficiaries of the plan, and the public.

(3) A quorum of the
board is six board members. All board actions require six concurring votes.

(4) The decisions of
the board shall be made in good faith and are final, binding, and conclusive on
all parties. The decisions of the board are subject to judicial review as
provided by law.

(5) A law enforcement
officers' and fire fighters' retirement system plan 2 expense account is
established for the purpose of defraying the expenses of the board. The board
shall prepare an annual budget consistent with chapter 43.88 RCW and shall draw
the funding for the budget from the investment income of the trust. Board
members shall be reimbursed for travel and education expenses as provided in
RCW 43.03.050 and 43.03.060. The board shall make an annual report to the
governor, legislature, and state auditor setting forth a summary of the costs
and expenditures of the plan for the preceding year. The board shall also
retain the services of an independent, certified public accountant who shall
annually audit the expenses of the account and whose report shall be included
in the board's annual report.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
6. CONTRIBUTIONS. (1) The
board of trustees shall establish contributions as set forth in this section.
The cost of the minimum benefits as defined in this plan shall be funded on the
following ratio:

Employee contributions
50%

Employer contributions
30%

State contributions
20%

(2) The minimum
benefits are a contractual obligation of the state and the contributing
employers and may not be reduced below the levels in effect on the effective
date of this act. The state and the contributing employers shall maintain the
minimum benefits on a sound actuarial basis in accordance with the actuarial
standards adopted by the board.

(3) Increased benefits
provided under section 5 of this act may not exceed the contributions provided
for in this section. In addition to the contributions necessary to maintain
the minimum benefits, for any increased benefits provided for by the board, the
employee contribution shall not exceed the greater of fifty percent of the
actuarial cost of the benefit or ten percent of covered payroll without the
consent of a majority of the affected employees. Employer contributions shall
not exceed the greater of thirty percent of the cost or six percent of covered
payroll. State contributions shall not exceed the greater of twenty percent of
the cost or four percent of covered payroll. Employer contributions may not be
increased above the maximum under this section without the consent of the
governing body of the employer. State contributions may not be increased above
the maximum provided in this section without the consent of the legislature.
In the event that the cost of maintaining the increased benefits on a sound
actuarial basis exceeds the aggregate contributions provided in this section,
the board shall submit to the affected members of the plan the option of paying
the increased costs or having the increased benefits reduced to a level
sufficient to be maintained by the aggregate contributions. A reduction of
benefits under this subsection is not a violation of the contractual rights of
the members, provided the reduction does not result in benefits being lower
than the level of the minimum benefits.

(4) The board shall
manage the trust in a manner that maintains reasonable contributions and
administrative costs. Providing additional benefits to members and beneficiaries
is the board's priority.

(5) All earnings of the
trust in excess of the actuarially assumed rate of investment return shall be
used exclusively for additional benefits for members and beneficiaries.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
7. ASSET MANAGEMENT. Assets
of the plan shall be managed by the state investment board as provided by law.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
8. SEVERABILITY. If any
provision of this act or its application to any person or circumstance is held
invalid, the remainder of the act or the application of the provision to other
persons or circumstances is not affected.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
9. CAPTIONS NOT LAW.
Captions used in this act are not any part of the law.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
10. IMPLEMENTING
LEGISLATION. The department of retirement systems and the office of the state
actuary shall prepare and submit to the fiscal committees of the legislature by
December 15, 2002, proposed legislation for implementing this act.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
11. CODIFICATION. Sections 1
through 9 and 12 of this act constitute a new chapter in Title 41 RCW.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 12. EFFECTIVE DATE. This act
takes effect July 1, 2003.

---
END ---