BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF
WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec.
1. A new section is added
to chapter 9A.16 RCW to read as follows:

(1) In a criminal
action brought because a person was detained on or in the immediate vicinity of
an outdoor music venue or related campground to investigate or question the
lawfulness of the person's consumption or possession of alcohol or drugs, it is
a defense that the person was detained in a reasonable manner and for a
reasonable time to permit the investigation or questioning by a law enforcement
officer, and that a peace officer, owner, operator, employee, or agent of the
outdoor music venue or related campground had reasonable grounds to believe
that the detained person unlawfully consumed or possessed alcohol or drugs on
the premises or attempted to do so.

(2) For the purposes of
this section:

(a) "Exhibiting
the effects of having consumed alcohol" means that a person has the odor
of alcohol on his or her breath, or that by speech, manner, appearance,
behavior, lack of coordination, or otherwise exhibits that he or she has
consumed alcohol, and either:

(i) Is in possession of
or in close proximity to a container that has or recently had alcohol in it; or

(ii) Is shown by other
evidence to have recently consumed alcohol.

(b) "Exhibiting the
effects of having consumed an illegal drug" means that a person by speech,
manner, appearance, behavior, lack of coordination, or otherwise exhibits that
he or she has consumed an illegal drug and either:

(i) Is in possession of
an illegal drug; or

(ii) Is shown by other
evidence to have recently consumed an illegal drug.

(c) "Illegal
drug" means a controlled substance under chapter 69.50 RCW for which the
detained person does not have a valid prescription or that is not being
consumed in accordance with the prescription directions and warnings, or a
legend drug under chapter 69.41 RCW for which the detained person does not have
a valid prescription or that is not being consumed in accordance with the
prescription directions and warnings.

(d) "Reasonable
grounds" includes, but is not limited to, observations that a person is
exhibiting the effects of having consumed alcohol or is exhibiting the effects
of having consumed an illegal drug.

(e) "Reasonable
time" means the time necessary to permit the detained person to make a
statement or to refuse to make a statement, and the time necessary to allow a
law enforcement officer to determine the lawfulness of the consumption or
possession of alcohol or drugs. This time may not exceed two hours.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
2. A new section is added
to chapter 4.24 RCW to read as follows:

(1) In a civil action
brought because a person was detained on or in the immediate vicinity of an
outdoor music venue or related campground to investigate or question the
lawfulness of the person's consumption or possession of alcohol or drugs, it is
a defense that the person was detained in a reasonable manner and for a
reasonable time to permit the investigation or questioning by a law enforcement
officer, and that a peace officer, owner, operator, employee, or agent of the
outdoor music venue or related campground had reasonable grounds to believe
that the detained person unlawfully consumed or possessed alcohol or drugs on
the premises or attempted to do so.

(2) For the purposes of
this section:

(a) "Exhibiting
the effects of having consumed alcohol" means that a person has the odor
of alcohol on his or her breath, or that by speech, manner, appearance,
behavior, lack of coordination, or otherwise exhibits that he or she has
consumed alcohol, and either:

(i) Is in possession of
or in close proximity to a container that has or recently had alcohol in it; or

(ii) Is shown by other
evidence to have recently consumed alcohol.

(b) "Exhibiting
the effects of having consumed an illegal drug" means that a person by
speech, manner, appearance, behavior, lack of coordination, or otherwise
exhibits that he or she has consumed an illegal drug and either:

(i) Is in possession of
an illegal drug; or

(ii) Is shown by other
evidence to have recently consumed an illegal drug.

(c) "Illegal
drug" means a controlled substance under chapter 69.50 RCW for which the
detained person does not have a valid prescription or that is not being
consumed in accordance with the prescription directions and warnings, or a
legend drug under chapter 69.41 RCW for which the detained person does not have
a valid prescription or that is not being consumed in accordance with the
prescription directions and warnings.

(d) "Reasonable
grounds" includes, but is not limited to, observations that a person is
exhibiting the effects of having consumed alcohol or is exhibiting the effects
of having consumed an illegal drug.

(e)
"Reasonable time" means the time necessary to permit the detained
person to make a statement or to refuse to make a statement, and the time
necessary to allow a law enforcement officer to determine the lawfulness of the
consumption or possession of alcohol or drugs. This time may not exceed two
hours.

---
END ---