BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF
WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1. RCW 43.136.010 and 1982
1st ex.s. c 35 s 39 are each amended to read as follows:

The legislature
recognizes that tax preferences are enacted by the legislature to meet
objectives which are determined to be in the public interest. The legislature
finds, however, that some tax preferences may not be efficient or equitable
tools for the achievement of current legislative objectives. The legislature
finds that unless it can be demonstrated that the public interest is served by
the continued existence of tax preferences, they should be terminated or
modified. The legislature further finds that periodic evaluations of tax
preferences are needed to determine if their continued existence is in the
public interest.

It is the intent of the
legislature to reaffirm the 1982 act with this 2002 act and to establish
a mechanism for scheduling periodic evaluations of tax preferences together
with a system for their termination, continuation, or modification. By this
mechanism, the legislature intends to ensure that thorough periodic evaluations
are made and that those tax preferences which do not continue to serve the
public interest are terminated or modified.

Sec. 2. RCW 43.136.030 and 1982
1st ex.s. c 35 s 41 are each amended to read as follows:

The joint
legislative ((budget)) audit and review committee shall review
each tax preference for termination by the processes provided in this chapter.
The review shall be completed and a report prepared on or before ((June))
September 30th of the year prior to the date established for
termination. Upon completion of its report, the joint legislative ((budget))
audit and review committee shall transmit copies of the report to the
department of revenue. The department of revenue may then conduct its own
review of the tax preference scheduled for termination and shall prepare a
report on or before ((September 30th)) December 31st of the year
prior to the date established for termination. Upon completion of its report
the department of revenue shall transmit copies of its report to the joint
legislative ((budget)) audit and review committee. The joint
legislative ((budget)) audit and review committee shall prepare a
final report that includes the reports of both the department of revenue and
the joint legislative ((budget)) audit and review
committee. The joint legislative ((budget)) audit and review
committee and the department of revenue shall, upon request, make available to
each other all working papers, studies, and other documents which relate to
reports required under this section. The joint legislative ((budget))
audit and review committee shall transmit the final report to all members
of the legislature, to the governor, and to the state library.

Sec. 3. RCW 43.136.040 and 1982
1st ex.s. c 35 s 42 are each amended to read as follows:

In reviewing a tax
preference, the joint legislative ((budget)) audit and review
committee shall develop information needed by the legislature to determine if
the tax preference should be terminated as scheduled, modified, or
reestablished without modification. The joint legislative ((budget))
audit and review committee shall consider, but not be limited to, the
following factors in the review.

(1) The persons or
organizations whose state tax liabilities are directly affected by the tax
preference.

(2) Legislative
objectives that might provide a justification for the tax preference.

(3) Evidence that the
existence of the tax preference has contributed to the achievement of any of
the objectives identified in subsection (2) of this section.

(4) The extent to which
continuation of the tax preference beyond its scheduled termination date might
contribute to any of the objectives identified in subsection (2) of this
section.

(5) Fiscal impacts of
the tax preference, including past impacts and expected future impacts if it is
not terminated as scheduled.

(6) The extent to which
termination of the tax preference would affect the distribution of liability
for payment of state taxes.

Sec. 4. RCW 43.136.050 and 1982
1st ex.s. c 35 s 43 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) Following receipt
of the final report from the joint legislative ((budget)) audit
and review committee, the ((ways and means committees)) finance
committee of the house of representatives and the ways and means
committee of the senate shall jointly hold a public hearing to consider the
final report and any related data. The committees shall also receive testimony
from the governor, or the governor's designee, and other interested parties,
including the general public.

(2) Following the joint
hearing, the committees may separately hold additional meetings or hearings to
come to a final determination as to whether a continuation, modification, or
termination of a tax preference is in the public interest. If a committee
determines that a tax preference should be continued or modified, it shall make
the determination as a bill. No more than one tax preference shall be
reestablished or modified in any one bill.

Sec. 5. RCW 43.136.070 and 1982
1st ex.s. c 35 s 45 are each amended to read as follows:

On or before September
30, 1982, the department of revenue shall provide the ((select)) joint legislative
audit and review committee with a report on existing tax preferences. The
report shall include a list of tax preferences and a description of each one. Upon
request of the ((select)) joint legislative audit and review
committee, the department of revenue shall provide additional information
needed by the ((select)) joint legislative audit and review
committee to meet its responsibilities under this chapter.

Sec. 6. RCW 82.04.050 and 2000
2nd sp.s. c 4 s 23 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) "Sale at
retail" or "retail sale" means every sale of tangible personal
property (including articles produced, fabricated, or imprinted) to all persons
irrespective of the nature of their business and including, among others, without
limiting the scope hereof, persons who install, repair, clean, alter, improve,
construct, or decorate real or personal property of or for consumers other than
a sale to a person who presents a resale certificate under RCW 82.04.470 and
who:

(a) Purchases for the
purpose of resale as tangible personal property in the regular course of
business without intervening use by such person, but a purchase for the purpose
of resale by a regional transit authority under RCW 81.112.300 is not a sale
for resale; or

(b) Installs, repairs,
cleans, alters, imprints, improves, constructs, or decorates real or personal
property of or for consumers, if such tangible personal property becomes an
ingredient or component of such real or personal property without intervening
use by such person; or

(c) Purchases for the
purpose of consuming the property purchased in producing for sale a new article
of tangible personal property or substance, of which such property becomes an
ingredient or component or is a chemical used in processing, when the primary
purpose of such chemical is to create a chemical reaction directly through
contact with an ingredient of a new article being produced for sale; or

(d) Purchases for the
purpose of consuming the property purchased in producing ferrosilicon which is
subsequently used in producing magnesium for sale, if the primary purpose of
such property is to create a chemical reaction directly through contact with an
ingredient of ferrosilicon; or

(e) Purchases for the
purpose of providing the property to consumers as part of competitive telephone
service, as defined in RCW 82.04.065. The term shall include every sale of
tangible personal property which is used or consumed or to be used or consumed
in the performance of any activity classified as a "sale at retail" or
"retail sale" even though such property is resold or utilized as
provided in (a), (b), (c), (d), or (e) of this subsection following such use.
The term also means every sale of tangible personal property to persons engaged
in any business which is taxable under RCW 82.04.280 (2) and (7) and 82.04.290.

(2) The term "sale
at retail" or "retail sale" shall include the sale of or charge
made for tangible personal property consumed and/or for labor and services
rendered in respect to the following:

(a) The installing,
repairing, cleaning, altering, imprinting, or improving of tangible personal
property of or for consumers, including charges made for the mere use of
facilities in respect thereto, but excluding charges made for the use of
coin-operated laundry facilities when such facilities are situated in an
apartment house, rooming house, or mobile home park for the exclusive use of
the tenants thereof, and also excluding sales of laundry service to nonprofit
health care facilities((, and excluding services rendered in respect to live
animals, birds and insects));

(b) The constructing,
repairing, decorating, or improving of new or existing buildings or other
structures under, upon, or above real property of or for consumers, including
the installing or attaching of any article of tangible personal property
therein or thereto, whether or not such personal property becomes a part of the
realty by virtue of installation, and shall also include the sale of services
or charges made for the clearing of land and the moving of earth excepting the
mere leveling of land used in commercial farming or agriculture;

(c) The charge for
labor and services rendered in respect to constructing, repairing, or improving
any structure upon, above, or under any real property owned by an owner who
conveys the property by title, possession, or any other means to the person
performing such construction, repair, or improvement for the purpose of
performing such construction, repair, or improvement and the property is then
reconveyed by title, possession, or any other means to the original owner;

(d) The sale of or
charge made for labor and services rendered in respect to the cleaning,
fumigating, razing, or moving of existing buildings or structures((,
but shall not include the charge made for janitorial services; and for purposes
of this section the term "janitorial services" shall mean those
cleaning and caretaking services ordinarily performed by commercial janitor
service businesses including, but not limited to, wall and window washing,
floor cleaning and waxing, and the cleaning in place of rugs, drapes and
upholstery. The term "janitorial services" does not include
painting, papering, repairing, furnace or septic tank cleaning, snow removal or
sandblasting));

(e) The sale of or charge
made for labor and services rendered in respect to automobile towing and
similar automotive transportation services, but not in respect to those
required to report and pay taxes under chapter 82.16 RCW;

(f) The sale of and
charge made for the furnishing of lodging and all other services by a hotel,
rooming house, tourist court, motel, trailer camp, and the granting of any
similar license to use real property, as distinguished from the renting or
leasing of real property, and it shall be presumed that the occupancy of real
property for a continuous period of one month or more constitutes a rental or
lease of real property and not a mere license to use or enjoy the same;

(g) The sale of or
charge made for tangible personal property, labor and services to persons
taxable under (a), (b), (c), (d), (e), and (f) of this subsection when such
sales or charges are for property, labor and services which are used or
consumed in whole or in part by such persons in the performance of any activity
defined as a "sale at retail" or "retail sale" even though
such property, labor and services may be resold after such use or consumption.
Nothing contained in this subsection shall be construed to modify subsection
(1) of this section and nothing contained in subsection (1) of this section
shall be construed to modify this subsection.

(3) The term "sale
at retail" or "retail sale" shall include the sale of or charge
made for ((personal, business, or professional)) the rendering of
services, other than a sale to a person who purchases for the purpose of
resale in the regular course of business, including those services
compensated by amounts designated as interest, rents, fees, admission, and
other service emoluments however designated, ((received)) provided
by persons engaging in ((the following)) business activities((:

(a) Amusement and
recreation services including but not limited to golf, pool, billiards,
skating, bowling, ski lifts and tows, day trips for sightseeing purposes, and
others, when provided to consumers;

(b) Abstract, title
insurance, and escrow services;

(c) Credit bureau
services;

(d) Automobile
parking and storage garage services;

(e) Landscape
maintenance and horticultural services but excluding (i) horticultural services
provided to farmers and (ii) pruning, trimming, repairing, removing, and
clearing of trees and brush near electric transmission or distribution lines or
equipment, if performed by or at the direction of an electric utility;

(f) Service charges
associated with tickets to professional sporting events; and

(g) The following
personal services: Physical fitness services, tanning salon services, tattoo
parlor services, steam bath services, turkish bath services, escort services,
and dating services.

(4) The term shall
also include the renting or leasing of tangible personal property to consumers
and the rental of equipment with an operator)).

(((5))) (4)
The term shall also include the providing of telephone service, as defined in
RCW 82.04.065, to consumers.

(((6))) (5)
The term shall also include the sale of canned software other than a sale to a
person who presents a resale certificate under RCW 82.04.470, regardless of the
method of delivery to the end user, but shall not include custom software or
the customization of canned software.

(6) The term
"sale at retail" or "retail sale shall not include any physical
or mental health care services, the provision of which is regulated by the
state under chapters 18.29, 18.32, 18.36, 18.50, 18.51, 18.53, 18.55, 18.57,
18.71, 18.74, 18.83, and 18.92 RCW.

(7) The term shall not
include the sale of or charge made for labor and services rendered in respect
to the building, repairing, or improving of any street, place, road, highway,
easement, right of way, mass public transportation terminal or parking
facility, bridge, tunnel, or trestle which is owned by a municipal corporation
or political subdivision of the state or by the United States and which is used
or to be used primarily for foot or vehicular traffic including mass transportation
vehicles of any kind.

(8) The term shall also
not include sales of ((chemical sprays or washes to persons for the purpose
of postharvest treatment of fruit for the prevention of scald, fungus, mold, or
decay, nor shall it include sales of)) feed, seed, seedlings, fertilizer,
agents for enhanced pollination including insects such as bees, and spray
materials to: (a) Persons who participate in the federal conservation reserve
program, the environmental quality incentives program, the wetlands reserve
program, and the wildlife habitat incentives program, or their successors
administered by the United States department of agriculture; (b) farmers for
the purpose of producing for sale any agricultural product; and (c) farmers
acting under cooperative habitat development or access contracts with an
organization exempt from federal income tax under 26 U.S.C. Sec. 501(c)(3) or
the Washington state department of fish and wildlife to produce or improve
wildlife habitat on land that the farmer owns or leases.

(9) The term shall not
include the sale of or charge made for labor and services rendered in respect
to the constructing, repairing, decorating, or improving of new or existing
buildings or other structures under, upon, or above real property of or for the
United States, any instrumentality thereof, or a county or city housing
authority created pursuant to chapter 35.82 RCW, including the installing, or
attaching of any article of tangible personal property therein or thereto,
whether or not such personal property becomes a part of the realty by virtue of
installation. Nor shall the term include the sale of services or charges made
for the clearing of land and the moving of earth of or for the United States,
any instrumentality thereof, or a county or city housing authority. Nor shall
the term include the sale of services or charges made for cleaning up for the
United States, or its instrumentalities, radioactive waste and other byproducts
of weapons production and nuclear research and development.

(10) Until July 1,
2003, the term shall not include the sale of or charge made for labor and
services rendered for environmental remedial action as defined in RCW
82.04.2635(2).

Sec. 7. RCW 82.12.010 and 2001 c
188 s 3 are each amended to read as follows:

For the purposes of
this chapter:

(1)(a) "Value of
the article used" shall mean the consideration, whether money, credit,
rights, or other property except trade-in property of like kind, expressed in
terms of money, paid or given or contracted to be paid or given by the
purchaser to the seller for the article of tangible personal property, the use
of which is taxable under this chapter. The term includes, in addition to the
consideration paid or given or contracted to be paid or given, the amount of
any tariff or duty paid with respect to the importation of the article used.
In case the article used is acquired by lease or by gift or is extracted,
produced, or manufactured by the person using the same or is sold under conditions
wherein the purchase price does not represent the true value thereof, the value
of the article used shall be determined as nearly as possible according to the
retail selling price at place of use of similar products of like quality and
character under such rules as the department of revenue may prescribe.

(b) In case the
articles used are acquired by bailment, the value of the use of the articles so
used shall be in an amount representing a reasonable rental for the use of the
articles so bailed, determined as nearly as possible according to the value of
such use at the places of use of similar products of like quality and character
under such rules as the department of revenue may prescribe. In case any such
articles of tangible personal property are used in respect to the construction,
repairing, decorating, or improving of, and which become or are to become an
ingredient or component of, new or existing buildings or other structures
under, upon, or above real property of or for the United States, any instrumentality
thereof, or a county or city housing authority created pursuant to chapter
35.82 RCW, including the installing or attaching of any such articles therein
or thereto, whether or not such personal property becomes a part of the realty
by virtue of installation, then the value of the use of such articles so used
shall be determined according to the retail selling price of such articles, or
in the absence of such a selling price, as nearly as possible according to the
retail selling price at place of use of similar products of like quality and
character or, in the absence of either of these selling price measures, such
value may be determined upon a cost basis, in any event under such rules as the
department of revenue may prescribe.

(c) In the case of
articles owned by a user engaged in business outside the state which are
brought into the state for no more than one hundred eighty days in any period
of three hundred sixty-five consecutive days and which are temporarily used for
business purposes by the person in this state, the value of the article used
shall be an amount representing a reasonable rental for the use of the
articles, unless the person has paid tax under this chapter or chapter 82.08
RCW upon the full value of the article used, as defined in (a) of this
subsection.

(d) In the case of
articles manufactured or produced by the user and used in the manufacture or
production of products sold or to be sold to the department of defense of the
United States, the value of the articles used shall be determined according to
the value of the ingredients of such articles.

(e) In the case of an
article manufactured or produced for purposes of serving as a prototype for the
development of a new or improved product, the value of the article used shall
be determined by: (i) The retail selling price of such new or improved product
when first offered for sale; or (ii) the value of materials incorporated into
the prototype in cases in which the new or improved product is not offered for
sale.

(f) In the case of an
article purchased with a direct pay permit under RCW 82.32.087, the value of
the article used shall be determined by the retail selling price, as defined in
RCW 82.08.010, of such article if but for the use of the direct pay permit the
transaction would have been subject to sales tax;

(2) "Value of
the service use" means the consideration, whether money, credit, rights,
or other property, expressed in terms of money, paid or given or contracted to
be paid or given by the purchaser to the seller for the service, the use of
which is taxable under this chapter. If the service is received by gift or
under conditions where the purchase price does not represent the true value of
the service, the value of the services used shall be determined as nearly as
possible according to the retail selling price at the place of use of similar
services of like quality and character under rules prescribed by the department
of revenue;

(3)
"Use," "used," "using," or "put to use"
shall have their ordinary meaning, and shall mean:

(a) With respect to
personal property, the first act within this state by which the taxpayer
takes or assumes dominion or control over the article of tangible personal
property (as a consumer), and include installation, storage, withdrawal from
storage, or any other act preparatory to subsequent actual use or consumption
within this state; and

(b) With respect to
a service which affords a benefit or is otherwise capable of utilization within
this state, the utilization within this state of the service, regardless of the
place of performance;

(((3))) (4)
"Taxpayer" and "purchaser" include all persons included
within the meaning of the word "buyer" and the word
"consumer" as defined in chapters 82.04 and 82.08 RCW;

(((4))) (5)
"Retailer" means every seller as defined in RCW 82.08.010 and every
person engaged in the business of selling tangible personal property or
services at retail and every person required to collect from purchasers the
tax imposed under this chapter;

(((5))) (6)
The meaning ascribed to words and phrases in chapters 82.04 and 82.08 RCW,
insofar as applicable, shall have full force and effect with respect to taxes
imposed under the provisions of this chapter. "Consumer," in
addition to the meaning ascribed to it in chapters 82.04 and 82.08 RCW insofar
as applicable, shall also mean any person who distributes or displays, or
causes to be distributed or displayed, any article of tangible personal
property, except newspapers, the primary purpose of which is to promote the sale
of products or services.

Sec. 8. RCW 82.08.080 and 1986 c
36 s 2 are each amended to read as follows:

The department of
revenue may authorize a seller to pay the tax levied under this chapter upon retail
sales of tangible personal property or services made under conditions of
business such as to render impracticable the collection of the tax as a
separate item and waive collection of the tax from the customer. Where sales
are made by receipt of a coin or coins dropped into a receptacle that results
in delivery of the merchandise in single purchases of smaller value than the
minimum sale upon which a one cent tax may be collected from the purchaser,
according to the schedule provided by the department under authority of RCW
82.08.060, and where the design of the sales device is such that multiple sales
of items are not possible or cannot be detected so as practically to assess a
tax, in such a case the selling price for the purposes of the tax imposed under
RCW 82.08.020 shall be sixty percent of the gross receipts of the vending
machine through which such sales are made. No such authority shall be granted
except upon application to the department and unless the department, after
hearing, finds that the conditions of the applicant's business are such as to
render impracticable the collection of the tax in the manner otherwise
provided. The department, by regulation, may provide that the applicant, under
this section, furnish a proper bond sufficient to secure the payment of the
tax.

Sec. 9. RCW 82.04.060 and 1998 c
332 s 5 are each amended to read as follows:

"Sale at
wholesale" or "wholesale sale" means: (1) Any sale of tangible
personal property, or any sale of a service, other than those services
enumerated under RCW 82.04.050 (6), (7), and (9); (2) any sale of amusement
or recreation services as defined in RCW 82.04.050(3)(a); (3) any sale of
canned software; or (4) any sale of telephone service as defined in RCW
82.04.065, which is not a sale at retail and means any charge made for labor
and services rendered for persons who are not consumers, in respect to real or
personal property or services, if such charge is expressly defined as a
retail sale by RCW 82.04.050 when rendered to or for consumers: PROVIDED, That
the term "real or personal property" as used in this section shall
not include any natural products named in RCW 82.04.100.

Sec. 10. RCW 82.04.190 and 1998 c
332 s 6 and 1998 c 308 s 2 are each reenacted and amended to read as follows:

"Consumer"
means the following:

(1) Any person who
purchases, acquires, owns, holds, or uses any article of tangible personal
property irrespective of the nature of the person's business and including,
among others, without limiting the scope hereof, persons who install, repair,
clean, alter, improve, construct, or decorate real or personal property of or
for consumers other than for the purpose (a) of resale as tangible personal
property in the regular course of business or (b) of incorporating such
property as an ingredient or component of real or personal property when
installing, repairing, cleaning, altering, imprinting, improving, constructing,
or decorating such real or personal property of or for consumers or (c) of
consuming such property in producing for sale a new article of tangible
personal property or a new substance, of which such property becomes an
ingredient or component or as a chemical used in processing, when the primary
purpose of such chemical is to create a chemical reaction directly through
contact with an ingredient of a new article being produced for sale or (d)
purchases for the purpose of consuming the property purchased in producing
ferrosilicon which is subsequently used in producing magnesium for sale, if the
primary purpose of such property is to create a chemical reaction directly
through contact with an ingredient of ferrosilicon;

(2)(a) Any person
engaged in any business activity taxable under RCW 82.04.290 and any person
who purchases, acquires, or uses any retail service included within the
definition of retail sale under RCW 82.04.050, other than for resale in the
regular course of business. Resale of a service included within the definition
of retail sale under RCW 82.04.050 means a separately stated charge to another
person for the service by a person who has paid or is obligated to pay an
identical charge to one who has originally rendered the identical service;
(b) any person who purchases, acquires, or uses any telephone service as
defined in RCW 82.04.065, other than for resale in the regular course of
business; (c) any person who purchases, acquires, or uses any amusement and
recreation service defined in RCW 82.04.050(3)(a), other than for resale in the
regular course of business; and (d) any person who is an end user of software;

(3) Any person engaged
in the business of contracting for the building, repairing or improving of any
street, place, road, highway, easement, right of way, mass public
transportation terminal or parking facility, bridge, tunnel, or trestle which
is owned by a municipal corporation or political subdivision of the state of
Washington or by the United States and which is used or to be used primarily
for foot or vehicular traffic including mass transportation vehicles of any
kind as defined in RCW 82.04.280, in respect to tangible personal property when
such person incorporates such property as an ingredient or component of such
publicly owned street, place, road, highway, easement, right of way, mass
public transportation terminal or parking facility, bridge, tunnel, or trestle
by installing, placing or spreading the property in or upon the right of way of
such street, place, road, highway, easement, bridge, tunnel, or trestle or in
or upon the site of such mass public transportation terminal or parking
facility;

(4) Any person who is
an owner, lessee or has the right of possession to or an easement in real
property which is being constructed, repaired, decorated, improved, or
otherwise altered by a person engaged in business, excluding only (a) municipal
corporations or political subdivisions of the state in respect to labor and
services rendered to their real property which is used or held for public road
purposes, and (b) the United States, instrumentalities thereof, and county and
city housing authorities created pursuant to chapter 35.82 RCW in respect to
labor and services rendered to their real property. Nothing contained in this
or any other subsection of this definition shall be construed to modify any
other definition of "consumer";

(5) Any person who is
an owner, lessee, or has the right of possession to personal property which is
being constructed, repaired, improved, cleaned, imprinted, or otherwise altered
by a person engaged in business;

(6) Any person engaged
in the business of constructing, repairing, decorating, or improving new or
existing buildings or other structures under, upon, or above real property of
or for the United States, any instrumentality thereof, or a county or city
housing authority created pursuant to chapter 35.82 RCW, including the
installing or attaching of any article of tangible personal property therein or
thereto, whether or not such personal property becomes a part of the realty by
virtue of installation; also, any person engaged in the business of clearing
land and moving earth of or for the United States, any instrumentality thereof,
or a county or city housing authority created pursuant to chapter 35.82 RCW.
Any such person shall be a consumer within the meaning of this subsection in
respect to tangible personal property incorporated into, installed in, or
attached to such building or other structure by such person;

(7) Any person who is a
lessor of machinery and equipment, the rental of which is exempt from the tax
imposed by RCW 82.08.020 ((under RCW 82.08.02565)), with respect to the
sale of or charge made for tangible personal property consumed in respect to
repairing the machinery and equipment, if the tangible personal property has a
useful life of less than one year. Nothing contained in this or any other
subsection of this section shall be construed to modify any other definition of
"consumer";

(8) Any person engaged
in the business of cleaning up for the United States, or its instrumentalities,
radioactive waste and other byproducts of weapons production and nuclear
research and development; and

(9) Until July 1, 2003,
any person engaged in the business of conducting environmental remedial action
as defined in RCW 82.04.2635(2).

Sec. 11. RCW 82.04.460 and 1985 c
7 s 154 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) Any person
rendering services taxable under RCW 82.04.250 or 82.04.270 by reason of the
amendments to RCW 82.04.050 in this act, or under RCW 82.04.290 and
maintaining places of business both within and without this state which
contribute to the rendition of such services shall, for the purpose of
computing tax liability under RCW 82.04.250, 82.04.270, or 82.04.290,
apportion to this state that portion of ((his)) gross proceeds of
sales or gross income which is derived from services rendered within this
state. Where such apportionment cannot be accurately made by separate
accounting methods, the taxpayer shall apportion to this state that proportion
of his total income which the cost of doing business within the state bears to
the total cost of doing business both within and without the state.

(2) Notwithstanding the
provision of subsection (1) of this section, persons doing business both within
and without the state who receive gross income from service charges, as defined
in RCW 63.14.010 (relating to amounts charged for granting the right or
privilege to make deferred or installment payments) or who receive gross income
from engaging in business as financial institutions within the scope of chapter
82.14A RCW (relating to city taxes on financial institutions) shall apportion
or allocate gross income taxable under RCW 82.04.290 to this state pursuant to
rules promulgated by the department consistent with uniform rules for
apportionment or allocation developed by the states.

(3) The department
shall by rule provide a method or methods of apportioning or allocating gross
income derived from sales of telephone services taxed under this chapter, if
the gross proceeds of sales subject to tax under this chapter do not fairly
represent the extent of the taxpayer's income attributable to this state. The
rules shall be, so far as feasible, consistent with the methods of apportionment
contained in this section and shall require the consideration of those facts,
circumstances, and apportionment factors as will result in an equitable and
constitutionally permissible division of the services.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
12. A new section is added
to chapter 82.08 RCW to read as follows:

The tax levied by RCW
82.08.020 does not apply to the sale of a service to a nonresident for use in a
state or possession of the United States or a province of Canada which does not
impose a tax on the retail sale or use of that service.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
13. A new section is added
to chapter 82.08 RCW to read as follows:

When services
constituting retail sales are rendered both within and without the state, the
selling price of sales for purposes of this chapter shall be apportioned to
this state in accordance with rules prescribed by the department of revenue.
The rules shall be, so far as feasible, consistent with the methods of
apportionment contained in RCW 82.04.460, and shall require the consideration
of those facts, circumstances, and apportionment factors as will result in an
equitable and constitutionally permissible division of the services.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
14. A new section is added
to chapter 82.12 RCW to read as follows:

An excise tax is
imposed on each person engaging in business in this state for the privilege of
putting to use within this state as a consumer, and in the performance of the
business, any service of a type which is included within the definition of
retail sale under RCW 82.04.050. The excise tax shall be collected in an
amount equal to the value of the services used by the consumer multiplied by
the rate in effect for the retail sales tax under RCW 82.08.020.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
15. A new section is added
to chapter 82.12 RCW to read as follows:

The tax imposed under
section 14 of this act does not apply in respect to the use of services if the
sale to, or the use by, the present user has already been subjected to the tax
under chapter 82.08 RCW or this chapter and that tax has been paid by the
present user.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
16. A new section is added
to chapter 82.12 RCW to read as follows:

The tax imposed under
section 14 of this act does not apply in respect to the use of services by the
same taxpayer that rendered the services.

Sec. 17. RCW 82.12.035 and 1996 c
148 s 6 are each amended to read as follows:

A credit shall be
allowed against the taxes imposed by this chapter upon the use of tangible
personal property, or services taxable under RCW 82.04.050(3)(a) or 82.12.010,
in the state of Washington in the amount that the present user thereof or his
or her bailor or donor has paid a retail sales or use tax with respect to such
property to any other state of the United States, any political subdivision
thereof, the District of Columbia, and any foreign country or political
subdivision thereof, prior to the use of such property in Washington.

Sec. 18. RCW 82.12.060 and 1975
1st ex.s. c 278 s 54 are each amended to read as follows:

In the case of
installment sales and leases of personal property or services, the
department, by regulation, may provide for the collection of taxes upon the
installments of the purchase price, or amount of rental, as of the time the
same fall due.

In the case of property
acquired by bailment, the department, by regulation, may provide for payment of
the tax due in installments based on the reasonable rental for the property as
determined under RCW 82.12.010(1).

Sec. 19. RCW 82.14.020 and 2001 c
186 s 3 are each amended to read as follows:

For purposes of this
chapter:

(1) A retail sale
consisting solely of the sale of tangible personal property shall be deemed to
have occurred at the retail outlet at or from which delivery is made to the
consumer;

(2) A retail sale
consisting essentially of ((the performance of personal business or
professional)) services shall be deemed to have occurred at the place at
which such services were primarily performed, except that for the performance of
a tow truck service, as defined in RCW 46.55.010, the retail sale shall be
deemed to have occurred at the place of business of the operator of the tow
truck service;

(3) A retail sale
consisting of the rental of tangible personal property shall be deemed to have
occurred (a) in the case of a rental involving periodic rental payments, at the
primary place of use by the lessee during the period covered by each payment,
or (b) in all other cases, at the place of first use by the lessee;

(4) A retail sale within
the scope of RCW 82.04.050(2), and a retail sale of taxable personal property
to be installed by the seller shall be deemed to have occurred at the place
where the labor and services involved were primarily performed;

(5) A retail sale
consisting of the providing to a consumer of telephone service, as defined in
RCW 82.04.065, other than a sale of tangible personal property under subsection
(1) of this section or a rental of tangible personal property under subsection
(3) of this section, shall be deemed to have occurred at the situs of the
telephone or other instrument through which the telephone service is rendered;

(6) A retail sale of
linen and uniform supply services is deemed to occur as provided in RCW
82.08.0202;

(7) "City"
means a city or town;

(8) The meaning
ascribed to words and phrases in chapters 82.04, 82.08 and 82.12 RCW, as now or
hereafter amended, insofar as applicable, shall have full force and effect with
respect to taxes imposed under authority of this chapter;

(9) "Taxable
event" shall mean any retail sale, or any use of an article of tangible
personal property, upon which a state tax is imposed pursuant to chapter 82.08
or 82.12 RCW, as they now exist or may hereafter be amended: PROVIDED, HOWEVER,
That the term shall not include a retail sale taxable pursuant to RCW
82.08.150, as now or hereafter amended;

(10) "Treasurer or
other legal depository" shall mean the treasurer or legal depository of a
county or city.

Sec. 20. RCW 82.08.0255 and 1998
c 176 s 4 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) The tax levied by
RCW 82.08.020 shall not apply to sales of:

(a) Motor vehicle fuel
used in aircraft by the manufacturer thereof for research, development, and
testing purposes, until June 30, 2002; and

(b) Motor vehicle and
special fuel if:

(i) The fuel is
purchased for the purpose of public transportation and the purchaser is
entitled to a refund or an exemption under RCW 82.36.275 or 82.38.080(3); or

(ii) The fuel is purchased
by a private, nonprofit transportation provider certified under chapter 81.66
RCW and the purchaser is entitled to a refund or an exemption under RCW
82.36.285 or 82.38.080(1)(h); or

(iii) The fuel is
taxable under chapter 82.36 or 82.38 RCW.

(2) Any person who has
paid the tax imposed by RCW 82.08.020 on the sale of special fuel delivered in
this state shall be entitled to a credit or refund of such tax with respect to
fuel subsequently established to have been actually transported and used outside
this state by persons engaged in interstate commerce. The tax shall be claimed
as a credit or refunded through the tax reports required under RCW 82.38.150.

Sec. 21. RCW 82.12.0256 and 1998
c 176 s 5 are each amended to read as follows:

The provisions of this
chapter shall not apply in respect to the use of:

(1) Motor vehicle fuel
used in aircraft by the manufacturer thereof for research, development, and
testing purposes, until June 30, 2002; and

(2) Special fuel purchased
in this state upon which a refund is obtained as provided in RCW 82.38.180(2);
and

(3) Motor vehicle and
special fuel if:

(a) The fuel is used
for the purpose of public transportation and the purchaser is entitled to a
refund or an exemption under RCW 82.36.275 or 82.38.080(3); or

(b) The fuel is
purchased by a private, nonprofit transportation provider certified under
chapter 81.66 RCW and the purchaser is entitled to a refund or an exemption
under RCW 82.36.285 or 82.38.080(1)(h); or

(c) The fuel is taxable
under chapter 82.36 or 82.38 RCW: PROVIDED, That the use of motor vehicle and
special fuel upon which a refund of the applicable fuel tax is obtained shall
not be exempt under this subsection (3)(c), and the director of licensing shall
deduct from the amount of such tax to be refunded the amount of tax due under
this chapter and remit the same each month to the department of revenue.

Sec. 22. RCW 82.36.230 and 1998 c
176 s 34 are each amended to read as follows:

The provisions of this
chapter requiring the payment of taxes do not apply to motor vehicle fuel
imported into the state in interstate or foreign commerce and intended to be
sold while in interstate or foreign commerce, nor to motor vehicle fuel
exported from this state by a licensee nor to any motor vehicle fuel sold by a
licensee to the armed forces of the United States or to the national guard for
use exclusively in ships or for export from this state. The licensee shall
report such imports, exports and sales to the department at such times, on such
forms, and in such detail as the department may require, otherwise the
exemption granted in this section is null and void, and all fuel shall be
considered distributed in this state fully subject to the provisions of this
chapter. Each invoice covering exempt sales shall have the statement "Ex
Washington Motor Vehicle Fuel Tax" clearly marked thereon.

To claim any exemption
from taxes under this section on account of sales by a licensee of motor
vehicle fuel for export, the purchaser shall obtain from the selling licensee,
and such selling licensee must furnish the purchaser, an invoice giving such
details of the sale for export as the department may require, copies of which
shall be furnished the department and the entity of the state or foreign
jurisdiction of destination which is charged by the laws of that state or
foreign jurisdiction with the control or monitoring, or both, of the sales or
movement of motor vehicle fuel in that state or foreign jurisdiction. For the
purposes of this section, motor vehicle fuel distributed to a federally
recognized Indian tribal reservation located within the state of Washington is
not considered exported outside this state.

To claim any refund of
taxes previously paid on account of sales of motor vehicle fuel to the armed
forces of the United States or to the national guard, the licensee shall be
required to execute an exemption certificate in such form as shall be furnished
by the department, containing a certified statement by an authorized officer of
the armed forces having actual knowledge of the purpose for which the exemption
is claimed. The provisions of this section exempting motor vehicle fuel sold
to the armed forces of the United States or to the national guard from the tax
imposed hereunder do not apply to any motor vehicle fuel sold to contractors
purchasing such fuel either for their own account or as the agents of the
United States or the national guard for use in the performance of contracts
with the armed forces of the United States or the national guard.

The department may at
any time require of any licensee any information the department deems necessary
to determine the validity of the claimed exemption, and failure to supply such
data will constitute a waiver of all right to the exemption claimed. The
department is hereby empowered with full authority to promulgate rules and
regulations and to prescribe forms to be used by licensees in reporting to the
department so as to prevent evasion of the tax imposed by this chapter.

Upon request from the
officials to whom are entrusted the enforcement of the motor vehicle fuel tax
law of any other state, the District of Columbia, the United States, its
territories and possessions, the provinces, or the Dominion of Canada, the
department may forward to such officials any information which the department
may have relative to the import or export of any motor vehicle fuel by any
licensee: PROVIDED, That such governmental unit furnish like information to
this state.

Sec. 23. RCW 82.38.080 and 1998 c
176 s 60 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) There is exempted
from the tax imposed by this chapter, the use of fuel for:

(a) Street and highway
construction and maintenance purposes in motor vehicles owned and operated by
the state of Washington, or any county or municipality;

(b) Publicly owned fire
fighting equipment;

(c) Special mobile
equipment as defined in RCW 46.04.552;

(d) Power pumping units
or other power take-off equipment of any motor vehicle which is accurately
measured by metering devices that have been specifically approved by the
department or which is established by any of the following formulae:

(i) Pumping propane, or
fuel or heating oils or milk picked up from a farm or dairy farm storage tank
by a power take-off unit on a delivery truck, at a rate determined by the
department: PROVIDED, That claimant when presenting his or her claim to the
department in accordance with this chapter, shall provide to the claim, invoices
of propane, or fuel or heating oil delivered, or such other appropriate
information as may be required by the department to substantiate his or her
claim;

(ii) Operating a power
take-off unit on a cement mixer truck or a load compactor on a garbage truck at
the rate of twenty-five percent of the total gallons of fuel used in such a
truck; or

(iii) The department is
authorized to establish by rule additional formulae for determining fuel usage
when operating other types of equipment by means of power take-off units when
direct measurement of the fuel used is not feasible. The department is also
authorized to adopt rules regarding the usage of on board computers for the
production of records required by this chapter;

(e) Motor vehicles
owned and operated by the United States government;

(f) Heating purposes;

(g) Moving a motor
vehicle on a public highway between two pieces of private property when said
moving is incidental to the primary use of the motor vehicle;

(h) Transportation
services for persons with special transportation needs by a private, nonprofit
transportation provider regulated under chapter 81.66 RCW;

(i) Vehicle
refrigeration units, mixing units, or other equipment powered by separate
motors from separate fuel tanks; and

(j) The operation of a
motor vehicle as a part of or incidental to logging operations upon a highway
under federal jurisdiction within the boundaries of a federal area if the
federal government requires a fee for the privilege of operating the motor
vehicle upon the highway, the proceeds of which are reserved for constructing
or maintaining roads in the federal area, or requires maintenance or
construction work to be performed on the highway for the privilege of operating
the motor vehicle on the highway.

(2) There is exempted
from the tax imposed by this chapter the removal or entry of special fuel under
the following circumstances and conditions:

(a) If it is the
removal from a terminal or refinery of, or the entry or sale of, a special fuel
if all of the following apply:

(i) The person
otherwise liable for the tax is a licensee other than a dyed special fuel user
or international fuel tax agreement licensee;

(ii) For a removal from
a terminal, the terminal is a licensed terminal; and

(iii) The special fuel
satisfies the dyeing and marking requirements of this chapter;

(b) If it is an entry
or removal from a terminal or refinery of taxable special fuel transferred to a
refinery or terminal and the persons involved, including the terminal operator,
are licensed; and

(c)(i) If it is a
special fuel that, under contract of sale, is shipped to a point outside this
state by a supplier by means of any of the following:

(A) Facilities operated
by the supplier;

(B) Delivery by the
supplier to a carrier, customs broker, or forwarding agent, whether hired by
the purchaser or not, for shipment to the out-of-state point;

(C) Delivery by the
supplier to a vessel clearing from port of this state for a port outside this
state and actually exported from this state in the vessel.

(ii) For purposes of
this subsection (2)(c):

(A) "Carrier"
means a person or firm engaged in the business of transporting for compensation
property owned by other persons, and includes both common and contract
carriers; and

(B) "Forwarding
agent" means a person or firm engaged in the business of preparing
property for shipment or arranging for its shipment.

(3) Notwithstanding any
provision of law to the contrary, every urban passenger transportation system
((and carriers as defined by chapters 81.68 and 81.70 RCW)) shall be
exempt from the provisions of this chapter requiring the payment of special
fuel taxes. For the purposes of this section "urban passenger
transportation system" means every publicly owned transportation
system, ((publicly or privately owned,)) having as its principal source
of revenue the income from transporting persons for compensation by means of
motor vehicles and/or trackless trolleys, each having a seating capacity for
over fifteen persons over prescribed routes in such a manner that the routes of
such motor vehicles and/or trackless trolleys, either alone or in conjunction
with routes of other such motor vehicles and/or trackless trolleys subject to
routing by the same transportation system, shall not extend for a distance
exceeding twenty-five road miles beyond the corporate limits of the county in
which the original starting points of such motor vehicles are located:
PROVIDED, That no refunds or credits shall be granted on special fuel used by any
urban transportation vehicle ((or vehicle operated pursuant to chapters
81.68 and 81.70 RCW)) on any trip where any portion of said trip is more
than twenty-five road miles beyond the corporate limits of the county in which
said trip originated.

Sec. 24. RCW 82.42.030 and 1989 c
193 s 4 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) Until June 30,
2002, the provision of RCW 82.42.020 imposing the payment of an excise tax
on each gallon of aircraft fuel sold, delivered or used in this state shall not
apply to aircraft fuel sold for export, nor to aircraft fuel used for the
following purposes: (((1))) (a) The operation of aircraft when
such use is by any air carrier or supplemental air carrier operating under a
certificate of public convenience and necessity under the provisions of the
Federal Aviation Act of 1958, Public Law 85-726, as amended; (((2))) (b)
the operation of aircraft for testing or experimental purposes; (((3))) (c)
the operation of aircraft when such operation is for the training of crews in
Washington state for purchasers of aircraft who are certified air carriers; and
(((4))) (d) the operation of aircraft in the operations of a
local service commuter: PROVIDED, That the director's determination as to a
particular activity for which aircraft fuel is used as being an exemption under
this section, or otherwise, shall be final.

(2) To claim an
exemption on account of sales by a licensed distributor of aircraft fuel for
export, the purchaser shall obtain from the selling distributor, and such
selling distributor must furnish the purchaser, an invoice giving such details
of the sale for export as the director may require, copies of which shall be
furnished the department and the entity of the state or foreign jurisdiction of
destination which is charged by the laws of that state or foreign jurisdiction
with the control or monitoring or both, of the sales or movement of aircraft
fuel in that state or foreign jurisdiction.

(3) On and after
July 1, 2002, the provision of RCW 82.42.020 imposing the payment of an excise
tax on each gallon of aircraft fuel sold, delivered, or used in this state does
not apply to aircraft fuel used for the operation of aircraft which is not
taxable by this state by reason of federal law.

Sec. 25. RCW 84.40.030 and 2001 c
187 s 17 are each amended to read as follows:

All property shall be
valued at one hundred percent of its true and fair value in money and assessed
on the same basis unless specifically provided otherwise by law.

Taxable leasehold
estates shall be valued at such price as they would bring at a fair, voluntary
sale for cash without any deductions for any indebtedness owed including
rentals to be paid.

The true and fair value
of real property for taxation purposes (including property upon which there is
a coal or other mine, or stone or other quarry) shall be based upon the following
criteria:

(1) Any sales of the
property being appraised or similar properties with respect to sales made
within the past five years. The appraisal shall be consistent with the
comprehensive land use plan, development regulations under chapter 36.70A RCW,
zoning, and any other governmental policies or practices in effect at the time
of appraisal that affect the use of property, as well as physical and
environmental influences. An assessment may not be determined by a method that
assumes a land usage not permitted, for that property being appraised, under
existing zoning or land use planning ordinances or statutes. The appraisal
shall also take into account: (a) In the use of sales by real estate contract
as similar sales, the extent, if any, to which the stated selling price has
been increased by reason of the down payment, interest rate, or other financing
terms; and (b) the extent to which the sale of a similar property actually
represents the general effective market demand for property of such type, in
the geographical area in which such property is located. Sales involving deed
releases or similar seller-developer financing arrangements shall not be used
as sales of similar property.

(2) In addition to
sales as defined in subsection (1) of this section, consideration may be given
to cost, cost less depreciation, reconstruction cost less depreciation, or
capitalization of income that would be derived from prudent use of the
property. In the case of property of a complex nature, or being used under
terms of a franchise from a public agency, or operating as a public utility, or
property not having a record of sale within five years and not having a
significant number of sales of similar property in the general area, the
provisions of this subsection shall be the dominant factors in valuation. When
provisions of this subsection are relied upon for establishing values the
property owner shall be advised upon request of the factors used in arriving at
such value.

(3) In valuing any
tract or parcel of real property, the true and fair value of the land,
exclusive of structures thereon shall be determined; also the true and fair
value of structures thereon, but the valuation shall not exceed the true and
fair value of the total property as it exists. In valuing agricultural land,
growing crops shall be excluded as long as the growing stock of nurserymen
shall not be considered as growing crops for the purposes of this chapter after
December 31, 2005.

Sec. 26. RCW 84.40.220 and 1974
ex.s. c 83 s 1 are each amended to read as follows:

Whoever owns, or has in
his possession or subject to his control, any goods, merchandise, grain or
produce of any kind, or other personal property within this state, with authority
to sell the same, which has been purchased either in or out of this state, with
a view to being sold at an advanced price or profit, or which has been
consigned to him from any place out of this state for the purpose of being sold
at any place within the state, shall be held to be a merchant, and when he is
by this title required to make out and to deliver to the assessor a statement
of his other personal property, he shall state the value of such property
pertaining to his business as a merchant. No consignee shall be required to
list for taxation the value of any property the product of this state, nor the
value of any property consigned to him from any other place for the sole
purpose of being stored or forwarded, if he has no interest in such property
nor any profit to be derived from its sale. The growing stock of nurserymen,
which is owned by the original producer thereof or which has been held or
possessed by the nurserymen for one hundred eighty days or more, shall, whether
personal or real property, be considered the same as growing crops on
cultivated lands((: PROVIDED, That)) as long as the nurserymen
((be)) is licensed by the department of agriculture((:
PROVIDED FURTHER, That)). Growing crops shall not include the growing
stock of nurserymen after December 31, 2005. An original producer, within
the meaning of this section, shall include a person who, beginning with seeds,
cuttings, bulbs, corms, or any form of immature plants, grows such plants in
the course of their development into either a marketable partially grown
product or a marketable consumer product.

Sec. 27. RCW 84.36.110 and 1988 c
10 s 1 are each amended to read as follows:

The following property
shall be exempt from taxation:

(1) All household goods
and furnishings in actual use by the owner thereof in equipping and outfitting
his or her residence or place of abode and not for sale or commercial use, and
all personal effects held by any person for his or her exclusive use and
benefit and not for sale or commercial use.

(2) Until December
31, 2004, the personal property, other than specified in subdivision (1)
hereof, of each head of a family liable to assessment and taxation of which
such individual is the actual and bona fide owner to an amount of three
thousand dollars of actual values: PROVIDED, That this exemption shall not
apply to any private motor vehicle, or mobile home, and: PROVIDED, FURTHER,
That if the county assessor is satisfied that all of the personal property of
any person is exempt from taxation under the provisions of this statute or any
other statute providing exemptions for personal property, no listing of such
property shall be required; but if the personal property described in this
subsection exceeds in value the amount allowed as exempt, then a complete list
of said personal property shall be made as provided by law, and the county
assessor shall deduct the amount of the exemption authorized by this subsection
from the total amount of the assessment and assess the remainder.

Sec. 28. RCW 82.04.280 and 1998 c
343 s 3 are each amended to read as follows:

Upon every person
engaging within this state in the business of: (1) Printing, and of publishing
newspapers, periodicals, or magazines; (2) building, repairing or improving any
street, place, road, highway, easement, right of way, mass public
transportation terminal or parking facility, bridge, tunnel, or trestle which
is owned by a municipal corporation or political subdivision of the state or by
the United States and which is used or to be used, primarily for foot or
vehicular traffic including mass transportation vehicles of any kind and
including any readjustment, reconstruction or relocation of the facilities of
any public, private or cooperatively owned utility or railroad in the course of
such building, repairing or improving, the cost of which readjustment,
reconstruction, or relocation, is the responsibility of the public authority
whose street, place, road, highway, easement, right of way, mass public
transportation terminal or parking facility, bridge, tunnel, or trestle is
being built, repaired or improved; (3) extracting for hire or processing for
hire; (4) operating a cold storage warehouse or storage warehouse, but not
including the rental of cold storage lockers; (5) representing and performing
services for fire or casualty insurance companies as an independent resident
managing general agent licensed under the provisions of RCW 48.05.310; (6)
radio and television broadcasting, excluding network, national and regional
advertising computed as a standard deduction based on the national average
thereof as annually reported by the Federal Communications Commission, or in
lieu thereof by itemization by the individual broadcasting station, and
excluding that portion of revenue represented by the out-of-state audience
computed as a ratio to the station's total audience as measured by the 100
micro-volt signal strength and delivery by wire, if any, however, after June
30, 2003, the exclusion provided in this subsection (6) is limited to gross
income from advertising which is not taxable by this state by reason of federal
law; (7) engaging in activities which bring a person within the definition
of consumer contained in RCW 82.04.190(6); as to such persons, the amount of
tax on such business shall be equal to the gross income of the business
multiplied by the rate of 0.484 percent.

As used in this
section, "cold storage warehouse" means a storage warehouse used to
store fresh and/or frozen perishable fruits or vegetables, meat, seafood, dairy
products, or fowl, or any combination thereof, at a desired temperature to
maintain the quality of the product for orderly marketing.

As used in this
section, "storage warehouse" means a building or structure, or any
part thereof, in which goods, wares, or merchandise are received for storage
for compensation, except field warehouses, fruit warehouses, fruit packing
plants, warehouses licensed under chapter 22.09 RCW, public garages storing
automobiles, railroad freight sheds, docks and wharves, and
"self-storage" or "mini storage" facilities whereby
customers have direct access to individual storage areas by separate entrance.
"Storage warehouse" does not include a building or structure, or that
part of such building or structure, in which an activity taxable under RCW
82.04.272 is conducted.

As used in this
section, "periodical or magazine" means a printed publication, other
than a newspaper, issued regularly at stated intervals at least once every
three months, including any supplement or special edition of the publication.

Sec. 29. RCW 82.16.050 and 2000 c
245 s 1 are each amended to read as follows:

In computing tax there
may be deducted from the gross income the following items:

(1) Amounts derived by
municipally owned or operated public service businesses, directly from taxes
levied for the support or maintenance thereof: PROVIDED, That this section
shall not be construed to exempt service charges which are spread on the
property tax rolls and collected as taxes;

(2) Amounts derived
from the sale of commodities to persons in the same public service business as
the seller, for resale as such within this state. This deduction is allowed
only with respect to water distribution, gas distribution or other public
service businesses which furnish water, gas or any other commodity in the
performance of public service businesses;

(3) Amounts actually
paid by a taxpayer to another person taxable under this chapter as the latter's
portion of the consideration due for services furnished jointly by both, if the
total amount has been credited to and appears in the gross income reported for
tax by the former;

(4) The amount of cash
discount actually taken by the purchaser or customer;

(5) The amount of
credit losses actually sustained by taxpayers whose regular books of accounts
are kept upon an accrual basis;

(6) Amounts derived
from business which the state is prohibited from taxing under the Constitution
of this state or the Constitution or laws of the United States on and after
July 1, 2003, with respect to amounts derived from transportation of persons or
property or transmission of communications from points of origin in this state
to points outside this state or from points of origin outside this state to
points within this state, there may be deducted from gross income amounts
attributable to the portion of the transportation or communication as occurs
outside this state under rules prescribed by the department of revenue;

(7) Until June 30,
2003, amounts derived from the distribution of water through an irrigation
system, for irrigation purposes;

(8) Until June 30,
2003, amounts derived from the transportation of commodities from points of
origin in this state to final destination outside this state, or from points of
origin outside this state to final destination in this state, with respect to
which the carrier grants to the shipper the privilege of stopping the shipment
in transit at some point in this state for the purpose of storing,
manufacturing, milling, or other processing, and thereafter forwards the same
commodity, or its equivalent, in the same or converted form, under a through
freight rate from point of origin to final destination; and amounts derived
from the transportation of commodities from points of origin in the state to an
export elevator, wharf, dock or ship side on tidewater or navigable tributaries
thereto from which such commodities are forwarded, without intervening
transportation, by vessel, in their original form, to interstate or foreign
destinations: PROVIDED, That no deduction will be allowed when the point of
origin and the point of delivery to such an export elevator, wharf, dock, or
ship side are located within the corporate limits of the same city or town;

(9) Amounts derived
from the production, sale, or transfer of electrical energy for resale within
or outside the state or for consumption outside the state;

(10) Amounts derived
from the distribution of water by a nonprofit water association and used for
capital improvements by that nonprofit water association;

(11) Amounts paid by a
sewerage collection business taxable under RCW 82.16.020(1)(a) to a person taxable
under chapter 82.04 RCW for the treatment or disposal of sewage.

Sec. 30. RCW 48.14.020 and 1986 c
296 s 1 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) Subject to other
provisions of this chapter, each authorized insurer except title insurers shall
on or before the first day of March of each year pay to the state treasurer
through the commissioner's office a tax on premiums. Except as provided in subsection
(2) of this section, such tax shall be in the amount of two percent of all
premiums, excluding amounts returned to or the amount of reductions in premiums
allowed to holders of industrial life policies for payment of premiums directly
to an office of the insurer, collected or received by the insurer during the
preceding calendar year other than ocean marine and foreign trade insurances,
after deducting premiums paid to policyholders as returned premiums, upon risks
or property resident, situated, or to be performed in this state. For the
purposes of this section the consideration received by an insurer for the
granting of an annuity shall not be deemed to be a premium.

(2) In the case of
insurers which require the payment by their policyholders at the inception of
their policies of the entire premium thereon in the form of premiums or premium
deposits which are the same in amount, based on the character of the risks,
regardless of the length of term for which such policies are written, such tax
shall be in the amount of two percent of the gross amount of such premiums and
premium deposits upon policies on risks resident, located, or to be performed
in this state, in force as of the thirty-first day of December next preceding,
less the unused or unabsorbed portion of such premiums and premium deposits
computed at the average rate thereof actually paid or credited to policyholders
or applied in part payment of any renewal premiums or premium deposits on
one-year policies expiring during such year.

(3) Each authorized
insurer shall with respect to all ocean marine and foreign trade insurance
contracts written within this state during the preceding calendar year, on or
before the first day of March of each year pay to the state treasurer through
the commissioner's office a tax of ninety-five one-hundredths of one percent on
its gross underwriting profit. Such gross underwriting profit shall be
ascertained by deducting from the net premiums (i.e., gross premiums less all
return premiums and premiums for reinsurance) on such ocean marine and foreign
trade insurance contracts the net losses paid (i.e., gross losses paid less
salvage and recoveries on reinsurance ceded) during such calendar year under
such contracts. In the case of insurers issuing participating contracts, such
gross underwriting profit shall not include, for computation of the tax
prescribed by this subsection, the amounts refunded, or paid as participation
dividends, by such insurers to the holders of such contracts.

(4) The state does hereby
preempt the field of imposing excise or privilege taxes upon insurers or their
agents, other than title insurers, and no county, city, town or other municipal
subdivision shall have the right to impose any such taxes upon such insurers or
their agents.

(5) If an authorized
insurer collects or receives any such premiums on account of policies in force
in this state which were originally issued by another insurer and which other
insurer is not authorized to transact insurance in this state on its own account,
such collecting insurer shall be liable for and shall pay the tax on such
premiums.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
31. A new section is added
to chapter 48.14 RCW to read as follows:

Health maintenance
organizations under chapter 48.46 RCW are subject to the tax imposed under this
chapter.

Sec. 32. RCW 48.44.020 and 2000 c
79 s 28 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) Any health care
service contractor may enter into contracts with or for the benefit of persons
or groups of persons which require prepayment for health care services by or
for such persons in consideration of such health care service contractor
providing one or more health care services to such persons and such activity
shall not be subject to the laws relating to insurance, except chapter 48.14
RCW after June 30, 2003, if the health care services are rendered by the
health care service contractor or by a participating provider.

(2) The commissioner
may on examination, subject to the right of the health care service contractor
to demand and receive a hearing under chapters 48.04 and 34.05 RCW, disapprove
any individual or group contract form for any of the following grounds:

(a) If it contains or
incorporates by reference any inconsistent, ambiguous or misleading clauses, or
exceptions and conditions which unreasonably or deceptively affect the risk
purported to be assumed in the general coverage of the contract; or

(b) If it has any
title, heading, or other indication of its provisions which is misleading; or

(c) If purchase of
health care services thereunder is being solicited by deceptive advertising; or

(d) If it contains
unreasonable restrictions on the treatment of patients; or

(e) If it violates any
provision of this chapter; or

(f) If it fails to
conform to minimum provisions or standards required by regulation made by the
commissioner pursuant to chapter 34.05 RCW; or

(g) If any contract for
health care services with any state agency, division, subdivision, board, or
commission or with any political subdivision, municipal corporation, or
quasi-municipal corporation fails to comply with state law.

(3) In addition to the
grounds listed in subsection (2) of this section, the commissioner may
disapprove any group contract if the benefits provided therein are unreasonable
in relation to the amount charged for the contract.

(4)(a) Every contract
between a health care service contractor and a participating provider of health
care services shall be in writing and shall state that in the event the health
care service contractor fails to pay for health care services as provided in
the contract, the enrolled participant shall not be liable to the provider for
sums owed by the health care service contractor. Every such contract shall provide
that this requirement shall survive termination of the contract.

(b) No participating
provider, agent, trustee, or assignee may maintain any action against an
enrolled participant to collect sums owed by the health care service
contractor.

Sec. 33. RCW 43.52.460 and 1971
ex.s. c 75 s 1 are each amended to read as follows:

Any joint operating
agency formed under this chapter shall pay in lieu of taxes payments in the
same amounts as paid by public utility districts. Such payments shall be
distributed in accordance with the provisions applicable to public utility
districts: PROVIDED, HOWEVER, That until June 30, 2003, such tax shall
not apply to steam generated electricity produced by a nuclear steam powered
electric generating facility constructed or acquired by a joint operating
agency and in operation prior to May 17, 1971.

Sec. 34. RCW 82.04.120 and 1999
sp.s. c 9 s 1 are each amended to read as follows:

Until June 30, 2003,
"to manufacture" embraces all activities of a commercial or
industrial nature wherein labor or skill is applied, by hand or machinery, to
materials so that as a result thereof a new, different or useful substance or
article of tangible personal property is produced for sale or commercial or
industrial use, and shall include: (1) The production or fabrication of
special made or custom made articles; (2) the production or fabrication of
dental appliances, devices, restorations, substitutes, or other dental
laboratory products by a dental laboratory or dental technician; (3) cutting,
delimbing, and measuring of felled, cut, or taken trees; and (4) crushing
and/or blending of rock, sand, stone, gravel, or ore.

"To
manufacture" shall not include: Conditioning of seed for use in planting;
cubing hay or alfalfa; activities which consist of cutting, grading, or ice
glazing seafood which has been cooked, frozen, or canned outside this state;
the growing, harvesting, or producing of agricultural products; or packing of
agricultural products, including sorting, washing, rinsing, grading, waxing,
treating with fungicide, packaging, chilling, or placing in controlled
atmospheric storage.

Sec. 35. RCW 82.04.260 and 2001
2nd sp.s. c 25 s 2 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) Upon every person
engaging within this state in the business of manufacturing:

(a) Wheat into flour,
barley into pearl barley, soybeans into soybean oil, canola into canola oil,
canola meal, or canola byproducts, or sunflower seeds into sunflower oil; as to
such persons the amount of tax with respect to such business shall be equal to
the value of the flour, pearl barley, oil, canola meal, or canola byproduct
manufactured, multiplied by the rate of 0.138 percent;

(b) Seafood products
which remain in a raw, raw frozen, or raw salted state at the completion of the
manufacturing by that person; as to such persons the amount of tax with respect
to such business shall be equal to the value of the products manufactured,
multiplied by the rate of 0.138 percent;

(c) By canning,
preserving, freezing, processing, or dehydrating fresh fruits and vegetables,
or selling at wholesale fresh fruits and vegetables canned, preserved, frozen,
processed, or dehydrated by the seller and sold to purchasers who transport in
the ordinary course of business the goods out of this state; as to such persons
the amount of tax with respect to such business shall be equal to the value of
the products canned, preserved, frozen, processed, or dehydrated multiplied by
the rate of 0.138 percent. As proof of sale to a person who transports in the
ordinary course of business goods out of this state, the seller shall annually
provide a statement in a form prescribed by the department and retain the
statement as a business record; and

(d) Dairy products that
as of September 20, 2001, are identified in 21 C.F.R., chapter 1, parts 131,
133, and 135, including byproducts from the manufacturing of the dairy products
such as whey and casein; or selling the same to purchasers who transport in the
ordinary course of business the goods out of state; as to such persons the tax
imposed shall be equal to the value of the products manufactured multiplied by
the rate of 0.138 percent. As proof of sale to a person who transports in the
ordinary course of business goods out of this state, the seller shall annually
provide a statement in a form prescribed by the department and retain the
statement as a business record.

(2) Upon every person
engaging within this state in the business of splitting or processing dried
peas; as to such persons the amount of tax with respect to such business shall
be equal to the value of the peas split or processed, multiplied by the rate of
0.138 percent.

(3) Upon every
nonprofit corporation and nonprofit association engaging within this state in
research and development, as to such corporations and associations, the amount
of tax with respect to such activities shall be equal to the gross income
derived from such activities multiplied by the rate of 0.484 percent.

(4) Upon every person
engaging within this state in the business of slaughtering, breaking and/or
processing perishable meat products and/or selling the same at wholesale only
and not at retail; as to such persons the tax imposed shall be equal to the
gross proceeds derived from such sales multiplied by the rate of 0.138 percent.

(5) Upon every person
engaging within this state in the business of making sales, at retail or
wholesale, of nuclear fuel assemblies manufactured by that person, as to such
persons the amount of tax with respect to such business shall be equal to the
gross proceeds of sales of the assemblies multiplied by the rate of 0.275
percent.

(6) Upon every person
engaging within this state in the business of manufacturing nuclear fuel
assemblies, as to such persons the amount of tax with respect to such business
shall be equal to the value of the products manufactured multiplied by the rate
of 0.275 percent.

(7) Upon every person
engaging within this state in the business of acting as a travel agent or tour
operator; as to such persons the amount of the tax with respect to such
activities shall be equal to the gross income derived from such activities
multiplied by the rate of 0.275 percent.

(8) Upon every person
engaging within this state in business as an international steamship agent,
international customs house broker, international freight forwarder, vessel
and/or cargo charter broker in foreign commerce, and/or international air cargo
agent; as to such persons the amount of the tax with respect to only
international activities shall be equal to the gross income derived from such
activities multiplied by the rate of 0.275 percent.

(9) Upon every person
engaging within this state in the business of stevedoring and associated
activities pertinent to the movement of goods and commodities in waterborne
interstate or foreign commerce; as to such persons the amount of tax with
respect to such business shall be equal to the gross proceeds derived from such
activities multiplied by the rate of 0.275 percent. Persons subject to
taxation under this subsection shall be exempt from payment of taxes imposed by
chapter 82.16 RCW for that portion of their business subject to taxation under
this subsection. Stevedoring and associated activities pertinent to the
conduct of goods and commodities in waterborne interstate or foreign commerce
are defined as all activities of a labor, service or transportation nature
whereby cargo may be loaded or unloaded to or from vessels or barges, passing over,
onto or under a wharf, pier, or similar structure; cargo may be moved to a
warehouse or similar holding or storage yard or area to await further movement
in import or export or may move to a consolidation freight station and be
stuffed, unstuffed, containerized, separated or otherwise segregated or
aggregated for delivery or loaded on any mode of transportation for delivery to
its consignee. Specific activities included in this definition are: Wharfage,
handling, loading, unloading, moving of cargo to a convenient place of delivery
to the consignee or a convenient place for further movement to export mode;
documentation services in connection with the receipt, delivery, checking,
care, custody and control of cargo required in the transfer of cargo; imported
automobile handling prior to delivery to consignee; terminal stevedoring and
incidental vessel services, including but not limited to plugging and
unplugging refrigerator service to containers, trailers, and other refrigerated
cargo receptacles, and securing ship hatch covers.

(10) Upon every person
engaging within this state in the business of disposing of low-level waste, as
defined in RCW 43.145.010; as to such persons the amount of the tax with
respect to such business shall be equal to the gross income of the business,
excluding any fees imposed under chapter 43.200 RCW, multiplied by the rate of
3.3 percent.

If the gross income of
the taxpayer is attributable to activities both within and without this state,
the gross income attributable to this state shall be determined in accordance
with the methods of apportionment required under RCW 82.04.460.

(11) Upon every person
engaging within this state as an insurance agent, insurance broker, or
insurance solicitor licensed under chapter 48.17 RCW; as to such persons, the
amount of the tax with respect to such licensed activities shall be equal to
the gross income of such business multiplied by the rate of 0.484 percent.

(12) Upon every person
engaging within this state in business as a hospital, as defined in chapter
70.41 RCW, that is operated as a nonprofit corporation or by the state or any
of its political subdivisions, as to such persons, the amount of tax with
respect to such activities shall be equal to the gross income of the business
multiplied by the rate of 0.75 percent through June 30, 1995, and 1.5 percent
thereafter. The moneys collected under this subsection shall be deposited in
the health services account created under RCW 43.72.900.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
36. A new section is added
to chapter 82.04 RCW to read as follows:

This chapter does not
apply to any person in respect to any business activity enumerated in RCW
48.44.015 or 48.46.040.

Sec. 37. RCW 82.36.020 and 2001 c
270 s 2 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) There is hereby
levied and imposed upon motor vehicle fuel users a tax at the rate computed in
the manner provided in RCW 82.36.025 on each gallon of motor vehicle fuel.

(2) The tax imposed by
subsection (1) of this section is imposed when any of the following occurs:

(a) Motor vehicle fuel
is removed in this state from a terminal if the motor vehicle fuel is removed
at the rack unless the removal is to a licensed exporter for direct delivery to
a destination outside of the state;

(b) Motor vehicle fuel
is removed in this state from a refinery if either of the following applies:

(i) The removal is by
bulk transfer and the refiner or the owner of the motor vehicle fuel
immediately before the removal is not a licensee; or

(ii) The removal is at
the refinery rack unless the removal is to a licensed exporter for direct
delivery to a destination outside of the state;

(c) Motor vehicle fuel
enters into this state for sale, consumption, use, or storage if either of the
following applies:

(i) The entry is by
bulk transfer and the importer is not a licensee; or

(ii) The entry is not
by bulk transfer;

(d) Motor vehicle fuel
is sold or removed in this state to an unlicensed entity unless there was a
prior taxable removal, entry, or sale of the motor vehicle fuel;

(e) Blended motor
vehicle fuel is removed or sold in this state by the blender of the fuel. The
number of gallons of blended motor vehicle fuel subject to the tax is the
difference between the total number of gallons of blended motor vehicle fuel
removed or sold and the number of gallons of previously taxed motor vehicle
fuel used to produce the blended motor vehicle fuel;

(f) Motor vehicle fuel
is sold by a licensed motor vehicle fuel supplier to a motor vehicle fuel
distributor, motor vehicle fuel importer, or motor vehicle fuel blender and the
motor vehicle fuel is not removed from the bulk transfer-terminal system.

(3) The proceeds of the
motor vehicle fuel excise tax shall be distributed as provided in RCW
46.68.090.

Sec. 38. RCW 82.48.030 and 1983
2nd ex.s. c 3 s 22 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) The amount of the
tax imposed by this chapter for each calendar year shall be as follows:

Type of
aircraft Registration fee

Single
engine fixed wing $ 50

Small multi-engine
fixed wing 65

Large multi-engine
fixed wing 80

Turboprop multi-engine
fixed wing 100

Turbojet multi-engine
fixed wing 125

Helicopter 75

Sailplane 20

Lighter
than air 20

Home built 20

(2) On and after
January 1, 2005, the amount of the tax imposed by this chapter for each
calendar year shall be two and two-tenths percent of the fair market value of
the aircraft, as determined under sections 39 and 40 of this act. The
amount of tax imposed under subsection (1) of this section for each calendar
year shall be divided into twelve parts corresponding to the months of the
calendar year and the excise tax upon an aircraft registered for the first time
in this state after the last day of any month shall only be levied for the
remaining months of the calendar year including the month in which the aircraft
is being registered: PROVIDED, That the minimum amount payable shall be three
dollars.

An aircraft shall be
deemed registered for the first time in this state when such aircraft was not
previously registered by this state for the year immediately preceding the year
in which application for registration is made.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
39. A new section is added
to chapter 82.48 RCW to read as follows:

After consultation with
the department of licensing, the department of revenue shall prepare at least
once each year a schedule for use in the collection of the excise tax imposed
by this chapter. The schedule shall be based on available information
pertaining to the fair market value of aircraft. Aircraft shall be classified
into a convenient number of classes on the basis of price, make, type, year of
manufacture, or any other reasonable basis, and the rate of tax prescribed in
RCW 82.48.030 shall be applied to the value of aircraft within the classes as
determined. In determining fair market value, the department of revenue may
use any guidebook, report, or compendium of recognized standing in the aircraft
industry. The schedule shall show, so far as possible, the amount of excise
tax for aircraft within each class and shall sufficiently describe the aircraft
included within each class to enable the department of licensing and its agents
to ascertain readily the amount of tax applicable to any particular aircraft.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
40. A new section is added
to chapter 82.48 RCW to read as follows:

Whenever a person
applies for a registration for an aircraft which does not appear on the
schedule, the applicant shall apply to the county assessor of the applicant's
county for computation of the amount of excise tax due. Upon application, the
assessor shall appraise the aircraft at its fair market value based on any
guidebook, report, or compendium of recognized standing in the aircraft
industry, ascertain the amount of excise tax by applying to the appraisal the
rate of the tax under this chapter, and give the applicant a certificate
showing the excise tax due under this chapter.

Sec. 41. RCW 84.36.020 and 1994 c
124 s 16 are each amended to read as follows:

The following real and
personal property shall be exempt from taxation:

(1) All lands,
buildings, and personal property required for necessary administration and
maintenance, used, or to the extent used, exclusively for public burying
grounds or cemeteries without discrimination as to race, color, national origin
or ancestry;

(2) Until December
31, 2005, all churches, personal property, and the ground, not exceeding
five acres in area, upon which a church of any nonprofit recognized religious
denomination is or shall be built, together with a parsonage, convent, and buildings
and improvements required for the maintenance and safeguarding of such
property. The area exempted shall in any case include all ground covered by
the church, parsonage, convent, and buildings and improvements required for the
maintenance and safeguarding of such property and the structures and ground
necessary for street access, parking, light, and ventilation, but the area of
unoccupied ground exempted in such cases, in connection with church, parsonage,
convent, and buildings and improvements required for the maintenance and
safeguarding of such property, shall not exceed the equivalent of one hundred
twenty by one hundred twenty feet except where additional unoccupied land may
be required to conform with state or local codes, zoning, or licensing
requirements. The parsonage and convent need not be on land contiguous to the
church property. To be exempt the property must be wholly used for church
purposes: PROVIDED, That the loan or rental of property otherwise exempt under
this paragraph to a nonprofit organization, association, or corporation, or
school for use for an eleemosynary activity shall not nullify the exemption
provided in this paragraph if the rental income, if any, is reasonable and is
devoted solely to the operation and maintenance of the property.

Sec. 42. RCW 84.36.060 and 1995 c
306 s 1 are each amended to read as follows:

The following property
shall be exempt from taxation:

(1) Until December
31, 2005, all art, scientific, or historical collections of associations
maintaining and exhibiting such collections for the benefit of the general
public and not for profit, together with all real and personal property of such
associations used exclusively for the safekeeping, maintaining and exhibiting of
such collections; and all the real and personal property owned by or leased to
associations engaged in the production and performance of musical, dance,
artistic, dramatic, or literary works for the benefit of the general public and
not for profit, which real and personal property is used exclusively for this
production or performance.

(a) To receive this
exemption an organization must be organized and operated exclusively for
artistic, scientific, historical, literary, musical, dance, dramatic, or
educational purposes and receive a substantial part of its support (exclusive
of income received in the exercise or performance by such organization of its
purpose or function) from the United States or any state or any political
subdivision thereof or from direct or indirect contributions from the general
public.

(b) If the property is
not currently being used for an exempt purpose but will be used for an exempt
purpose within a reasonable period of time, the nonprofit organization,
association, or corporation claiming the exemption must submit proof that a
reasonably specific and active program is being carried out to construct,
remodel, or otherwise enable the property to be used for an exempt purpose.
The property does not qualify for an exemption during this interim period if
the property is used by, loaned to, or rented to a for-profit organization or
business enterprise. Proof of a specific and active program to build or
remodel the property so it may be used for an exempt purpose may include, but
is not limited to:

(i) Affirmative action
by the board of directors, trustees, or governing body of the nonprofit
organization, association, or corporation toward an active program of
construction or remodeling;

(ii) Itemized reasons
for the proposed construction or remodeling;

(iii) Clearly
established plans for financing the construction or remodeling; or

(iv) Building permits.

(c) Notwithstanding (b)
of this subsection, a for-profit limited partnership created to provide
facilities for the use of nonprofit art, scientific, or historical
organizations qualifies for the exemption under (b) of this subsection through
1997 if the for-profit limited partnership otherwise qualifies under (b) of
this subsection.

(2) All fire engines
and other implements used for the extinguishment of fire, with the buildings
used exclusively for the safekeeping thereof, and for meetings of fire
companies, provided such properties belong to any city or town or to a fire
company therein.

(3) Property owned by
humane societies in this state in actual use by such societies.

Sec. 43. RCW 46.10.040 and 2001
2nd sp.s. c 7 s 918 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) Application
for registration shall be made to the department in the manner and upon forms
the department prescribes, and shall state the name and address of each owner
of the snowmobile to be registered, and shall be signed by at least one such
owner, and shall be accompanied by an annual registration fee to be established
by the commission, after consultation with the committee and any statewide
snowmobile user groups, and after December 31, 2005, an annual excise tax of
two and two-tenths percent of the fair market value of the snowmobile. The
fair market value of the snowmobile shall be determined under sections 44 and
45 of this act. The commission shall increase the current fee of twenty
dollars by five dollars effective September 30, 2001, and the commission shall
increase the fee by another five dollars effective September 30, 2002. After
the fee increase effective September 30, 2002, the commission shall not
increase the fee. Upon receipt of the application and the application fee, the
snowmobile shall be registered and a registration number assigned, which shall
be affixed to the snowmobile in a manner provided in RCW 46.10.070.

(2) The
registration and excise tax provided in this section shall be valid for
a period of one year. At the end of the period of registration, every owner of
a snowmobile in this state shall renew his or her registration in the manner
the department prescribes, for an additional period of one year, upon payment
of the annual registration fee as determined by the commission and payment
of the annual excise tax.

(3) Any person
acquiring a snowmobile already validly registered under the provisions of this
chapter must, within ten days of the acquisition or purchase of the snowmobile,
make application to the department for transfer of the registration, and the
application shall be accompanied by a transfer fee of one dollar and
twenty-five cents.

A snowmobile owned by a
resident of another state or Canadian province where registration is not
required by law may be issued a nonresident registration permit valid for not
more than sixty days. Application for the permit shall state the name and
address of each owner of the snowmobile to be registered and shall be signed by
at least one owner and shall be accompanied by a registration fee of five
dollars. The registration permit shall be carried on the vehicle at all times
during its operation in this state.

(4) The
registration fees and excise taxes provided in this section shall be in
lieu of any personal property or excise tax heretofore imposed on snowmobiles
by this state or any political subdivision thereof, and no city, county, or
other municipality, and no state agency shall hereafter impose any other
registration or license fee on any snowmobile in this state.

(5) The
department shall make available a pair of uniform decals consistent with the
provisions of RCW 46.10.070. In addition to the registration fee provided in
this section the department shall charge each applicant for registration the
actual cost of the decal. The department shall make available replacement
decals for a fee equivalent to the actual cost of the decals.

(6) The excise tax
for a snowmobile registered for the first time in this state during calendar
year 2006 shall be prorated for the remaining months of the calendar year,
including the month in which the snowmobile is registered, only if the current
owner first acquired the snowmobile within one month of the date of application
for registration. The excise tax for a snowmobile registered for the first
time in this state after December 31, 2006, shall be prorated for the remaining
months of the calendar year, including the month in which the snowmobile is
registered. A snowmobile is registered for the first time in this state if the
snowmobile was not registered in this state for the immediately preceding year.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
44. After consultation with
the department of licensing, the department of revenue shall prepare at least
once each year a schedule for use in the collection of the excise tax imposed
under this chapter. The schedule shall be based on available information
pertaining to the fair market value of snowmobiles. The snowmobiles shall be
classified into a convenient number of classes on the basis of price, make,
type, year of manufacture, or any other reasonable basis, and the rate of tax
shall be applied to the value of snowmobiles within the classes as determined.
In determining fair market value, the department of revenue may use any
guidebook, report, or compendium of recognized standing. The schedule shall
show, so far as possible, the amount of excise tax for snowmobiles within each
class and shall sufficiently describe the snowmobiles included within each
class to enable the department of licensing and its agents to ascertain readily
the amount of tax applicable to any particular snowmobile.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
45. Whenever a person applies
for a registration for a snowmobile which does not appear on the schedule, the
applicant shall apply to the county assessor of the applicant's county for computation
of the amount of excise tax due. Upon application, the assessor shall appraise
the snowmobile at its fair market value based on any guidebook, report, or
compendium of recognized standing, ascertain the amount of excise tax by
applying to the appraisal the rate of the tax under this chapter, and give the
applicant a certificate showing the excise tax due under this chapter.

Sec. 46. RCW 15.76.165 and 1973 c
117 s 1 are each amended to read as follows:

Any county which owns
or leases property from another governmental agency and provides such property
for area or county and district agricultural fair purposes may apply to the
director for special assistance in carrying out necessary capital improvements
to such property and maintenance of the appurtenances thereto((, and)).
Until December 31, 2004, in the event such property and capital
improvements are leased to any organization conducting an agricultural fair
pursuant to chapter 15.76 RCW and chapter 257 of the Laws of 1955, such
leasehold and such leased property shall be exempt from real and personal
property taxation.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
47. A new section is added
to chapter 43.136 RCW to read as follows:

Tax preferences
contained in the following statutes will terminate June 30, 2002, unless
extended by law. These preferences, their termination, and necessary
amendments to related statutes, are subject to the review procedures in this
chapter:

(1) RCW 82.04.050 (2),
(3), (6), and (7);

(2) RCW 82.12.010 (2)
and (3);

(3) RCW 82.08.080;

(4) RCW 82.04.060;

(5) RCW 82.04.190(2);

(6) RCW 82.04.460(1);

(7) RCW 82.04.470;

(8) Sections 12, 13,
14, 15, and 16 of this act;

(9) RCW 82.12.035 and
82.12.040;

(10) RCW 82.12.060;

(11) RCW 82.14.020;

(12) RCW 82.04.255;

(13) RCW 82.08.0255(1);

(14) RCW 82.12.0256(1);

(15) RCW 82.36.230;

(16) RCW 82.36.020;

(17) RCW 82.38.080(3);
and

(18) RCW 82.42.030.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
48. A new section is added
to chapter 43.136 RCW to read as follows:

Tax preferences
contained in the following statutes will terminate June 30, 2003, unless
extended by law. These preferences, their termination, and necessary
amendments to related statutes, are subject to the review procedures in this
chapter:

(1) RCW 82.04.280(6);

(2) RCW 82.16.050 (6),
(7), and (8);

(3) RCW 48.14.020(1);

(4) RCW 48.44.020(1);

(5) Section 31 of this
act;

(6) RCW 43.52.460;

(7) RCW 82.04.120; and

(8) RCW 82.04.260.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
49. A new section is added
to chapter 43.136 RCW to read as follows:

Tax preferences
contained in the following statutes will terminate December 31, 2005, unless
extended by law. These preferences, their termination, and necessary
amendments to related statutes, are subject to the review procedures in this
chapter:

(1) RCW 15.76.165;

(2) RCW 82.48.030;

(3) RCW 84.36.110(2);

(4) RCW 84.36.480;

(5) Section 39 of this
act; and

(6) Section 40 of this
act.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
50. A new section is added
to chapter 43.136 RCW to read as follows:

Tax preferences
contained in the following statutes will terminate December 31, 2005, unless
extended by law. These preferences, their termination, and necessary
amendments to related statutes, are subject to the review procedures in this
chapter:

(1) RCW 84.36.020(2);

(2) RCW 84.36.060(1);

(3) RCW 84.40.030(3);

(4) RCW 84.40.220;

(5) RCW 46.10.040;

(6) Section 44 of this
act; and

(7) Section 45 of this
act.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
51. A new section is added
to chapter 43.136 RCW to read as follows:

These tax preferences,
their termination, and necessary amendments to related statutes, are subject to
the review procedures in this chapter. The preferences will terminate, unless
extended by law:

(1) RCW 66.20.010(6).

NEW SECTION. Sec.
52. The following acts or
parts of acts are each repealed:

(1) RCW 82.04.298 (Tax on qualified grocery
distribution cooperatives) and 2001 1st sp.s. c 9 s 1;

(2) RCW 82.04.315 (Exemptions--International
banking facilities) and 1982 c 95 s 7;

(3) RCW 82.04.317 (Exemptions--Motor vehicle
sales by manufacturers at wholesale auctions to dealers) and 1997 c 4 s 1;

(4) RCW 82.04.322 (Exemptions--Health
maintenance organization, health care service contractor, certified health
plan) and 1993 c 492 s 303;

(5) RCW 82.04.324 (Exemptions--Blood, bone,
or tissue bank--Exceptions) and 1995 2nd sp.s. c 9 s 3;

(6) RCW 82.04.327 (Exemptions--Adult family
homes) and 1987 1st ex.s. c 4 s 1;

(7) RCW 82.04.331 (Exemptions--Wholesale
sales to farmers of seed for planting, conditioning seed for planting owned by
others) and 1998 c 170 s 2;

(8) RCW 82.04.332 (Exemptions--Buying and
selling at wholesale wheat, oats, dry peas, dry beans, lentils, triticale,
canola, corn, rye, and barley) and 1998 c 312 s 2;

(9) RCW 82.04.333 (Exemptions--Small
harvesters) and 1990 c 141 s 1;

(10) RCW 82.04.337 (Exemptions--Amounts
received by hop growers or dealers for processed hops shipped outside the
state) and 1987 c 495 s 1;

(11) RCW 82.04.338 (Exemptions--Hop commodity
commission or hop commodity board business) and 1998 c 200 s 1;

(12) RCW 82.04.339 (Exemptions--Day care
provided by churches) and 1992 c 81 s 1;

(13) RCW 82.04.395 (Exemptions--Certain
materials printed in school district and educational service district printing
facilities) and 1979 ex.s. c 196 s 12;

(14) RCW 82.04.363 (Exemptions--Camp or
conference center--Items sold or furnished by nonprofit organization) and 1997
c 388 s 1;

(15) RCW 82.04.3651 (Exemptions--Amounts
received by nonprofit organizations for fund-raising activities) and 1999 c 358
s 3 & 1998 c 336 s 2;

(16) RCW 82.04.367 (Exemptions--Nonprofit
organizations that are guarantee agencies, issue debt, or provide guarantees
for student loans) and 1998 c 324 s 1 & 1987 c 433 s 1;

(17) RCW 82.04.368 (Exemptions--Nonprofit
organizations--Credit and debt services) and 1993 c 390 s 1;

(18) RCW 82.04.392 (Exemptions--Mortgage
brokers' third-party provider services trust accounts) and 1998 c 311 s 3 &
1997 c 106 s 21;

(19) RCW 82.04.394 (Exemptions--Amounts
received by property management company for on-site personnel) and 1998 c 338 s
2;

(20) RCW 82.04.399 (Exemptions--Sales of
academic transcripts) and 1996 c 272 s 1;

(21) RCW 82.04.416 (Exemptions--Operation of
state route No. 16) and 1998 c 179 s 3;

(22) RCW 82.04.4201
(Exemptions--Sales/leasebacks by regional transit authorities) and 2000 2nd
sp.s. c 4 s 24;

(23) RCW 82.04.421 (Exemptions--Out-of-state
membership sales in discount programs) and 1997 c 408 s 1;

(24) RCW 82.04.422 (Exemptions--Wholesale
sales of motor vehicles) and 2001 c 258 s 1;

(25) RCW 82.04.4327 (Deductions--Artistic and
cultural organizations--Income from business activities) and 1985 c 471 s 6;

(26) RCW 82.04.4329 (Deductions--Health
insurance pool members--Deficit assessments) and 1987 c 431 s 24;

(27) RCW 82.04.433 (Deductions--Sales of fuel
for consumption outside United States' waters by vessels in foreign
commerce--Construction) and 1985 c 471 s 16;

(28) RCW 82.04.4331 (Deductions--Insurance
claims for state health care coverage) and 1988 c 107 s 33;

(29) RCW 82.04.4332 (Deductions--Tuition fees
of foreign degree-granting institutions) and 1993 c 181 s 10;

(30) RCW 82.04.4333 (Credit--Job training
services--Approval) and 1996 c 1 s 4;

(31) RCW 82.04.434 (Credit--Public safety standards
and testing) and 1991 c 13 s 1;

(32) RCW 82.04.44525 (Credit--New employment
for international service activities in eligible areas--Designation of census
tracts for eligibility--Records--Tax due upon ineligibility--Interest
assessment--Information from employment security department) and 1998 c 313 s
2;

(33) RCW 82.04.4453 (Credit--Ride-sharing,
public transportation, or nonmotorized commuting incentives--Penalty--Report to
legislature) and 1999 c 402 s 1, 1996 c 128 s 1, & 1994 c 270 s 2;

(34) RCW 82.04.4454 (Credit--Ride-sharing,
public transportation, or nonmotorized commuting incentives--Ceiling) and 1999
c 402 s 3, 1996 c 128 s 2, & 1994 c 270 s 3;

(35) RCW 82.08.02525 (Exemptions--Sale of
copied public records by state and local agencies) and 1996 c 63 s 1;

(36) RCW 82.08.02535 (Exemptions--Sales and
distribution of magazines or periodicals by subscription for fund-raising) and
1995 2nd sp.s. c 8 s 1;

(37) RCW 82.08.02537 (Exemptions--Sales of
academic transcripts) and 1996 c 272 s 2;

(38) RCW 82.08.02565 (Exemptions--Sales of
machinery and equipment for manufacturing, research and development, or a
testing operation--Labor and services for installation--Exemption
certificate--Rules) and 1999 c 211 s 5, 1999 c 211 s 3, & 1998 c 330 s 1;

(39) RCW 82.08.02566 (Exemptions--Sales of
tangible personal property incorporated in prototype for parts, auxiliary
equipment, and aircraft modification--Limitations on yearly exemption) and 1997
c 302 s 1 & 1996 c 247 s 4;

(40) RCW 82.08.02567 (Exemptions--Sales related
to machinery and equipment used in generating electricity) and 2001 c 213 s 1,
1999 c 358 s 4, 1998 c 309 s 1, & 1996 c 166 s 1;

(41) RCW 82.08.02568 (Exemptions--Sales of
carbon and similar substances that become an ingredient or component of anodes
or cathodes used in producing aluminum for sale) and 1996 c 170 s 1;

(42) RCW 82.08.02569 (Exemptions--Sales of
tangible personal property related to a building or structure that is an
integral part of a laser interferometer gravitational wave observatory) and
1996 c 113 s 1;

(43) RCW 82.08.02573 (Exemptions--Sales by a
nonprofit organization for fund-raising activities) and 1998 c 336 s 3;

(44) RCW 82.08.026 (Exemptions--Sales of
natural or manufactured gas) and 1994 c 124 s 8 & 1989 c 384 s 4;

(45) RCW 82.08.02665 (Exemptions--Sales of
watercraft, vessels to residents of foreign countries) and 1999 c 358 s 6 &
1993 c 119 s 1;

(46) RCW 82.08.02745 (Exemptions--Charges for
labor and services or sales of tangible personal property related to
agricultural employee housing--Exemption certificate--Rules) and 1997 c 438 s 1
& 1996 c 117 s 1;

(47) RCW 82.08.02795 (Exemptions--Sales to free
hospitals) and 1993 c 205 s 1;

(48) RCW 82.08.02805 (Exemptions--Sales to
blood, bone, or tissue bank--Exceptions) and 1995 2nd sp.s. c 9 s 4;

(49) RCW 82.08.02806 (Exemptions--Sales of
human blood, tissue, organs, bodies, or body parts for medical research and
quality control testing) and 1996 c 141 s 1;

(50) RCW 82.08.02875 (Exemptions--Vehicle
parking charges subject to tax at stadium and exhibition center) and 1997 c 220
s 203;

(51) RCW 82.08.02915 (Exemptions--Sales used by
health or social welfare organizations for alternative housing for youth in
crisis) and 1998 c 183 s 1, 1997 c 386 s 56, & 1995 c 346 s 1;

(52) RCW 82.08.02917 (Youth in
crisis--Definition--Limited purpose) and 1995 c 346 s 3;

(53) RCW 82.08.0294 (Exemptions--Sales of feed
for cultivating or raising fish for sale) and 1985 c 148 s 3;

(54) RCW 82.08.0295 (Exemptions--Lease amounts
and repurchase amount for certain property under sale/leaseback agreement) and
1986 c 231 s 3;

(55) RCW 82.08.0296 (Exemptions--Sales of feed
consumed by livestock at a public livestock market) and 1986 c 265 s 1;

(56) RCW 82.08.0297 (Exemptions--Sales of food
purchased with food stamps) and 1998 c 79 s 18 & 1987 c 28 s 1;

(57) RCW 82.08.0298 (Exemptions--Sales of
diesel fuel for use in operating watercraft in commercial deep sea fishing or commercial
passenger fishing boat operations outside the state) and 1987 c 494 s 1;

(58) RCW 82.08.0299 (Exemptions--Emergency
lodging for homeless persons--Conditions) and 1988 c 61 s 1;

(59) RCW 82.08.0311 (Exemptions--Sales of
materials and supplies used in packing horticultural products) and 1988 c 68 s
1;

(60) RCW 82.08.0315 (Exemptions--Rentals or
sales related to motion picture or video productions--Exceptions--Certificate)
and 1997 c 61 s 1 & 1995 2nd sp.s. c 5 s 1;

(61) RCW 82.08.036 (Exemptions--Vehicle
battery core deposits or credits--Replacement vehicle tire fees--"Core
deposits or credits" defined) and 1989 c 431 s 45;

(62) RCW 82.08.810 (Exemptions--Air pollution
control facilities at a thermal electric generation
facility--Exceptions--Exemption certificate--Payments on cessation of
operation) and 1997 c 368 s 2;

(63) RCW 82.08.811 (Exemptions--Coal used at
coal-fired thermal electric generation facility--Application--Demonstration of
progress in air pollution control--Notice of emissions violations--
Reapplication--Payments on cessation of operation) and 1997 c 368 s 4;

(64) RCW 82.08.820
(Exemptions--Remittance--Warehouse and grain elevators and distribution
centers--Material-handling and racking equipment--Construction of warehouse or
elevator--Information sheet--Rules--Records--Exceptions) and 1997 c 450 s 2;

(65) RCW 82.08.830 (Exemptions--Sales at camp
or conference center by nonprofit organization) and 1997 c 388 s 2;

(66) RCW 82.08.832 (Exemptions--Sales of gun
safes) and 1998 c 178 s 1;

(67) RCW 82.08.834
(Exemptions--Sales/leasebacks by regional transit authorities) and 2000 2nd
sp.s. c 4 s 21;

(68) RCW 82.08.840 (Exemptions--Machinery,
equipment, or structures that reduce field burning) and 2000 c 40 s 2;

(69) RCW 82.08.850 (Exemptions--Conifer seed)
and 2001 c 129 s 2;

(70) RCW 82.08.860 (Exemptions--Landslide
area) and 2001 c 113 s 1;

(71) RCW 82.08.870 (Exemptions--Motorcycles
for training programs) and 2001 c 285 s 2;

(72) RCW 82.08.880 (Exemptions--Animal
pharmaceuticals) and 2001 2nd sp.s. c 17 s 1;

(73) RCW 82.08.890 (Exemptions--Dairy
nutrient management equipment and facilities) and 2001 2nd sp.s. c 18 s 2;

(74) RCW 82.08.900 (Exemptions--Anaerobic
digesters) and 2001 2nd sp.s. c 18 s 4;

(75) RCW 82.08.910 (Exemptions--Propane or
natural gas to heat chicken structures) and 2001 2nd sp.s. c 25 s 3;

(76) RCW 82.08.920 (Exemptions--Chicken
bedding materials) and 2001 2nd sp.s. c 25 s 5;

(77) RCW 82.12.022 (Natural or manufactured
gas--Use tax imposed--Exemption) and 1994 c 124 s 9 & 1989 c 384 s 3;

(78) RCW 82.12.02545 (Exemption--Use of naval
aircraft training equipment transferred due to base closure) and 1995 c 128 s
1;

(79) RCW 82.12.02565 (Exemptions--Machinery and
equipment used for manufacturing, research and development, or a testing
operation) and 1999 c 211 s 6, 1998 c 330 s 2, 1996 c 247 s 3, & 1995 1st
sp.s. c 3 s 3;

(80) RCW 82.12.02566 (Exemptions--Use of
tangible personal property incorporated in prototype for aircraft parts,
auxiliary equipment, and aircraft modification--Limitations on yearly
exemption) and 1997 c 302 s 2 & 1996 c 247 s 5;

(81) RCW 82.12.02568 (Exemptions--Use of carbon
and similar substances that become an ingredient or component of anodes or
cathodes used in producing aluminum for sale) and 1996 c 170 s 2;

(82) RCW 82.12.02569 (Exemptions--Use of
tangible personal property related to a building or structure that is an
integral part of a laser interferometer gravitational wave observatory) and
1996 c 113 s 2;

(83) RCW 82.12.02595 (Exemptions--Use of
donated tangible personal property by nonprofit organization or governmental
entity or for purpose donated--Use of related property) and 1998 c 182 s 1
& 1995 c 201 s 1;

(84) RCW 82.12.02685 (Exemptions--Use of
tangible personal property related to agricultural employee housing) and 1997 c
438 s 2 & 1996 c 117 s 2;

(85) RCW 82.12.02745 (Exemptions--Use by free
hospitals of certain items) and 1993 c 205 s 2;

(86) RCW 82.12.02747 (Exemptions--Use by blood,
bone, or tissue bank--Exceptions) and 1995 2nd sp.s. c 9 s 5;

(87) RCW 82.12.02748 (Exemptions--Use of human
blood, tissue, organs, bodies, or body parts for medical research or quality
control testing) and 1996 c 141 s 2;

(88) RCW 82.12.02915 (Exemptions--Use of items
by health or social welfare organizations for alternative housing for youth in
crisis) and 1998 c 183 s 2, 1997 c 386 s 57, & 1995 c 346 s 2;

(89) RCW 82.12.02917 (Exemptions--Use of
amusement and recreation services by nonprofit youth organization) and 1999 c
358 s 7;

(90) RCW 82.12.0294 (Exemptions--Use of feed
for cultivating or raising fish for sale) and 1985 c 148 s 4;

(91) RCW 82.12.0295 (Exemptions--Lease amounts
and repurchase amount for certain property under sale/leaseback agreement) and
1986 c 231 s 4;

(92) RCW 82.12.0296 (Exemptions--Use of feed
consumed by livestock at a public livestock market) and 1986 c 265 s 2;

(93) RCW 82.12.0297 (Exemptions--Use of food
purchased with food stamps) and 1998 c 79 s 19 & 1987 c 28 s 2;

(94) RCW 82.12.0298 (Exemptions--Use of diesel
fuel in operating watercraft in commercial deep sea fishing or commercial
passenger fishing boat operations outside the state) and 1987 c 494 s 2;

(95) RCW 82.12.0311 (Exemptions--Use of
materials and supplies in packing horticultural products) and 1988 c 68 s 2;

(96) RCW 82.12.0315 (Exemptions--Rental or
sales related to motion picture or video productions--Exceptions) and 1995 2nd
sp.s. c 5 s 2;

(97) RCW 82.12.0345 (Exemptions--Use of
newspapers) and 1994 c 124 s 11;

(98) RCW 82.12.0347 (Exemptions--Use of
academic transcripts) and 1996 c 272 s 3;

(99) RCW 82.12.038 (Exemptions--Vehicle battery
core deposits or credits--Replacement vehicle tire fees--"Core deposits or
credits" defined) and 1989 c 431 s 46;

(100) RCW 82.12.800 (Exemptions--Uses of
vessel, vessel's trailer by manufacturer) and 1997 c 293 s 1;

(101) RCW 82.12.801 (Exemptions--Uses of
vessel, vessel's trailer by dealer) and 1997 c 293 s 2;

(102) RCW 82.12.802 (Vessels held in inventory
by dealer or manufacturer--Tax on personal use--Documentation--Rules) and 1997
c 293 s 3;

(103) RCW 82.12.810 (Exemptions--Air pollution
control facilities at a thermal electric generation
facility--Exceptions--Payments on cessation of operation) and 1997 c 368 s 3;

(104) RCW 82.12.811 (Exemptions--Coal used at
coal-fired thermal electric generation facility--Application--Demonstration of
progress in air pollution control--Notice of emissions
violations--Reapplication--Payments on cessation of operation) and 1997 c 368 s
6;

(105) RCW 82.12.820 (Exemptions--Warehouse and
grain elevators and distribution centers) and 2000 c 103 s 9 & 1997 c 450 s
3;

(106) RCW 82.12.832 (Exemptions--Use of gun
safes) and 1998 c 178 s 2;

(107) RCW 82.12.834
(Exemptions--Sales/leasebacks by regional transit authorities) and 2001 c 320 s
6 & 2000 2nd sp.s. c 4 s 22;

(108) RCW 82.12.840 (Exemptions--Machinery,
equipment, or structures that reduce field burning) and 2000 c 40 s 3;

(109) RCW 82.12.845 (Use of motorcycles loaned
to department of licensing) and 2001 c 121 s 1;

(110) RCW 82.12.850 (Exemptions--Conifer seed)
and 2001 c 129 s 3;

(111) RCW 82.12.880 (Exemptions--Animal
pharmaceuticals) and 2001 2nd sp.s. c 17 s 2;

(112) RCW 82.12.890 (Exemptions--Dairy
nutrient management equipment and facilities) and 2001 2nd sp.s. c 18 s 3;

(113) RCW 82.12.900 (Exemptions--Anaerobic
digesters) and 2001 2nd sp.s. c 18 s 5;

(114) RCW 82.12.910 (Exemptions--Propane or
natural gas to heat chicken structures) and 2001 2nd sp.s. c 25 s 4;

(115) RCW 82.12.920 (Exemptions--Chicken
bedding materials) and 2001 2nd sp.s. c 25 s 6;

(116) RCW 82.08.0259 (Exemptions--Sales of
livestock) and 2001 c 118 s 4 & 1980 c 37 s 27;

(117) RCW 82.12.0261 (Exemptions--Use of
livestock) and 2001 c 118 s 5 & 1980 c 37 s 60;

(118) RCW 82.08.0267 (Exemptions--Sales of
poultry for producing poultry and poultry products for sale) and 1980 c 37 s
34;

(119) RCW 82.12.0262 (Exemptions--Use of
poultry for producing poultry and poultry products for sale) and 1980 c 37 s
61;

(120) RCW 82.08.0272 (Exemptions--Sales of
semen for artificial insemination of livestock) and 1980 c 37 s 38;

(121) RCW 82.12.0267 (Exemptions--Use of semen
in artificial insemination of livestock) and 1980 c 37 s 66;

(122) RCW 82.08.0277 (Exemptions--Sales of
pollen) and 1980 c 37 s 43;

(123) RCW 82.12.0273 (Exemptions--Use of
pollen) and 1980 c 37 s 71;

(124) RCW 82.08.0257 (Exemptions--Auction sales
of tangible personal property used in farming) and 1980 c 37 s 25;

(125) RCW 82.12.0258 (Exemptions--Use of
tangible personal property previously used in farming and purchased from farmer
at auction) and 1980 c 37 s 58;

(126) RCW 82.12.0265 (Exemptions--Use by bailee
of tangible personal property consumed in research, development, etc.,
activities) and 1980 c 37 s 64;

(127) RCW 82.08.0276 (Exemptions--Sales of
wearing apparel for use only as a sample for display for sale) and 1980 c 37 s
42;

(128) RCW 82.12.0271 (Exemptions--Use of
wearing apparel only as a sample for display for sale) and 1980 c 37 s 69;

(129) RCW 82.08.0253 (Exemptions--Sale and
distribution of newspapers) and 1980 c 37 s 21;

(130) RCW 82.08.0282 (Exemptions--Sales of
returnable containers for beverages and foods) and 1980 c 37 s 47;

(131) RCW 82.08.031 (Exemptions--Sales to
artistic or cultural organizations of certain objects acquired for exhibition
or presentation) and 1981 c 140 s 4; and

(132) RCW 82.12.031 (Exemptions--Use by
artistic or cultural organizations of certain objects) and 1981 c 140 s 5.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
53. The following acts or
parts of acts are each repealed:

(1) RCW 48.32.145 (Credit against premium
tax for assessments paid pursuant to RCW 48.32.060(1)(c)) and 1997 c 300 s 1,
1993 sp.s. c 25 s 901, 1977 ex.s. c 183 s 1, & 1975-'76 2nd ex.s. c 109 s
11;

(2) RCW 82.04.330 (Exemptions--Sales of
agricultural products) and 2001 c 118 s 3, 1993 sp.s. c 25 s 305, 1988 c 253 s
2, & 1987 c 23 s 4;

(3) RCW 82.04.335 (Exemptions--Agricultural
fairs) and 1965 ex.s. c 145 s 1;

(4) RCW 82.04.410 (Exemptions--Hatching eggs
and poultry) and 1967 ex.s. c 149 s 15 & 1961 c 15 s 82.04.410;

(5) RCW 82.04.4281
(Deductions--Investments--Dividends from subsidiary corporations) and 1980 c 37
s 2;

(6) RCW 82.04.4287 (Deductions--Compensation
for receiving, washing, etc., horticultural products for person exempt under
RCW 82.04.330--Materials and supplies used) and 1980 c 37 s 8;

(7) RCW 82.04.4292 (Deductions--Interest on
investments or loans secured by mortgages or deeds of trust) and 1980 c 37 s
12;

(8) RCW 82.04.4293 (Deductions--Interest on
obligations of the state, its political subdivisions, and municipal
corporations) and 1980 c 37 s 13;

(9) RCW 82.04.4294 (Deductions--Interest on
loans to farmers and ranchers, producers or harvesters of aquatic products, or
their cooperatives) and 1980 c 37 s 14;

(10) RCW 82.04.4298 (Deductions--Repair,
maintenance, replacement, etc., of residential structures and commonly held
property--Eligible organizations) and 1980 c 37 s 18;

(11) RCW 82.04.4322 (Deductions--Artistic or
cultural organization‑-Compensation from United States, state, etc., for
artistic or cultural exhibitions, performances, or programs) and 1981 c 140 s
1;

(12) RCW 82.04.4324 (Deductions--Artistic or
cultural organization‑-Deduction for tax under RCW 82.04.240--Value of
articles for use in displaying art objects or presenting artistic or cultural
exhibitions, performances, or programs) and 1981 c 140 s 2;

(13) RCW 82.04.4326 (Deductions--Artistic or
cultural organizations--Tuition charges for attending artistic or cultural
education programs) and 1981 c 140 s 3;

(14) RCW 82.16.055 (Deductions relating to
energy conservation or production from renewable resources) and 1980 c 149 s 3;

(15) RCW 82.29A.135 (Exemption for leasehold
interests in land, buildings, machinery, etc., used to manufacture alcohol
fuel--Exceptions--Limitations--Claims--Administrative rules) and 1985 c 371 s 3
& 1980 c 157 s 2;

(16) RCW 82.35.050 (Credit against
taxes--Conditions--Amount--Limitations) and 1982 1st ex.s. c 2 s 1 & 1979
ex.s. c 191 s 5;

(17) RCW 84.36.080 (Certain ships and
vessels) and 2000 c 103 s 24, 1998 c 335 s 5, 1986 c 229 s 1, 1983 2nd ex.s. c
3 s 51, 1983 c 7 s 23, & 1961 c 15 s 84.36.080; and

(18) RCW 84.36.105 (Cargo containers used in
ocean commerce) and 1975 1st ex.s. c 20 s 1.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
54. The following acts or
parts of acts are each repealed:

(1) RCW 84.36.030 (Property used for
character building, benevolent, protective or rehabilitative social
services--Camp facilities--Veteran or relief organization owned
property--Property of nonprofit organizations that issue debt for student loans
or that are guarantee agencies) and 1993 c 327 s 2, 1990 c 283 s 6, 1987 c 433
s 2, 1984 c 220 s 1, 1983 1st ex.s. c 25 s 1, & 1973 2nd ex.s. c 40 s 2;

(2) RCW 84.36.040 (Nonprofit day care
centers, libraries, orphanages, homes or hospitals for the sick or infirm,
outpatient dialysis facilities) and 2001 c 126 s 1, 1989 c 379 s 1, 1987 c 31 s
1, 1984 c 220 s 2, 1973 2nd ex.s. c 40 s 3, 1973 1st ex.s. c 154 s 119, 1969 ex.s.
c 245 s 1, & 1961 c 15 s 84.36.040;

(3) RCW 84.36.050 (Schools and colleges) and
2001 c 126 s 2, 1984 c 220 s 5, 1973 2nd ex.s. c 40 s 4, 1971 ex.s. c 206 s 2,
1970 ex.s. c 55 s 1, & 1961 c 15 s 84.36.050;

(4) RCW 84.36.070 (Intangible personal
property--Appraisal) and 1997 c 181 s 1, 1974 ex.s. c 118 s 1, & 1961 c 15
s 84.36.070;

(5) RCW 84.36.090 (Exemption for other ships
and vessels) and 1983 c 7 s 24 & 1961 c 15 s 84.36.090;

(6) RCW 84.36.400 (Improvements to single
family dwellings) and 1972 ex.s. c 125 s 3;

(7) RCW 84.36.015 (Property valued at less
than five hundred dollars--Exceptions) and 1997 c 244 s 1;

(8) RCW 84.36.042 (Nonprofit organization,
corporation, or association property used to provide housing for persons with
developmental disabilities) and 1998 c 202 s 1;

(9) RCW 84.36.046 (Nonprofit cancer clinic
or center) and 1997 c 143 s 1;

(10) RCW 84.36.255 (Improvements to benefit
fish and wildlife habitat, water quality, and water quantity--Cooperative
assistance to landowners--Certification of best management
practice--Limitation--Landowner claim and certification) and 1997 c 295 s 2;

(11) RCW 84.36.487 (Air pollution control
equipment in thermal electric generation facilities--Records--Payments on
cessation of operation) and 1997 c 368 s 11;

(12) RCW 84.36.510 (Mobile homes in dealer's
inventory) and 1985 c 395 s 7;

(13) RCW 84.36.550 (Nonprofit
organizations--Property used for solicitation or collection of gifts,
donations, or grants) and 1993 c 79 s 1;

(14) RCW 84.36.560 (Nonprofit organizations
that provide rental housing or used space to very low-income households) and
2001 1st sp.s. c 7 s 1 & 1999 c 203 s 1;

(15) RCW 84.36.570 (Nonprofit
organizations--Property used for agricultural research and education programs)
and 1999 c 139 s 1;

(16) RCW 84.36.595 (Motor vehicles, travel
trailers, and campers) and 2000 c 136 s 1;

(17) RCW 84.36.600 (Computer software) and
1991 sp.s. c 29 s 3;

(18) RCW 84.36.605 (Sales/leasebacks by
regional transit authorities) and 2000 2nd sp.s. c 4 s 27; and

(19) RCW 84.36.630 (Farming machinery and
equipment) and 2001 2nd sp.s. c 24 s 1.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
55. (1) Section 52 of this
act takes effect July 1, 2002.

(2) Section 53 of this
act takes effect July 1, 2003.

(3)
Section 54 of this act takes effect July 1, 2005.

---
END ---