BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF
WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec.
1. A new section is added
to chapter 59.18 RCW to read as follows:

A prospective tenant
shall disclose his or her status as a registered sex offender who is classified
as risk level III in any tenant application provided by a tenant screening
service or a landlord. Failure to comply with this section is a misdemeanor.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
2. A new section is added
to chapter 9A.44 RCW to read as follows:

Each county sheriff
shall notify in writing every person registering with him or her under RCW
9A.44.130 of the requirements of section 1 of this act at the time the person
registers with the county sheriff and shall obtain written acknowledgment of
the notification.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
3. A new section is added
to chapter 59.18 RCW to read as follows:

A landlord, upon
obtaining information provided under RCW 4.24.550, including the county
sheriff's published list or web site, or otherwise discovering that a
prospective tenant or tenant is, in fact, a registered sex offender who is
classified as risk level III, may refuse tenancy to the prospective tenant or
immediately evict the tenant after serving the tenant with a written notice to
vacate. A tenant who is evicted under this section has twenty-four hours to
vacate the premises. Any property of a tenant that remains on the premises
longer than twenty-four hours after the tenant receives a written notice to
vacate under this section shall be considered abandoned property. A landlord
is immune from liability for any injuries, damages, or harm resulting from any
offense committed by the prospective tenant or tenant.

Sec. 4. RCW 59.18.257 and 1991 c
194 s 3 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) If a landlord uses
a tenant screening service, then the landlord may only charge for the costs
incurred for using the tenant screening service under this section. If a
landlord conducts his or her own screening of tenants, then the landlord may
charge his or her actual costs in obtaining the background information, but the
amount may not exceed the customary costs charged by a screening service in the
general area. The landlord's actual costs include costs incurred for long
distance phone calls and for time spent calling landlords, employers, and
financial institutions.

(2) A landlord may not
charge a prospective tenant for the cost of obtaining background information
under this section unless the landlord first notifies the prospective tenant in
writing of what a tenant screening entails, the prospective tenant's rights to
dispute the accuracy of information provided by the tenant screening service or
provided by the entities listed on the tenant application who will be contacted
for information concerning the tenant, and the name and address of the tenant
screening service used by the landlord.

(3) Nothing in this
section requires a landlord to disclose information to a prospective tenant
that was obtained from a tenant screening service or from entities listed on
the tenant application which is not required under the federal fair credit
reporting act, 15 U.S.C. Sec. 1681 et seq.

(4) If a prospective
tenant or tenant omits or falsifies material information on a rental
application that, if known, would have disqualified the prospective tenant or
tenant from consideration for tenancy, the landlord may recover from the
prospective tenant or tenant a fee not to exceed the actual cost to the
landlord of obtaining the background information.

(5)
Any landlord, prospective tenant, or tenant who violates this section
may be liable to the ((prospective tenant)) other party for an
amount not to exceed one hundred dollars. The prevailing party may also
recover court costs and reasonable attorneys' fees.

---
END ---