BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF
WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec.
1. It is the intent of the
legislature to provide improved means of review by which to evaluate the budget
requests of state agencies. The legislature establishes the zero-base and
modified zero-base budget review process to help the legislature establish
priorities in the expenditure of public resources for state programs and
services.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
2. The definitions in this
section apply throughout this chapter unless the context clearly requires
otherwise.

(1) "Review"
means a modified zero-base budget review or a zero-based budget review, as
appropriate.

(2)
"Committees" means the appropriations committee of the house of
representatives and the ways and means committee of the senate and the
committees' respective staffs.

(3) "Modified
zero-base budget review" means a written document prepared by the staff to
the committees that contains an analysis of the budget and the programmatic and
fiscal basis of the agency on which the review is conducted. A modified
zero-base budget review may consider the agency's past and current incremental
funding.

(4) "Zero-base
budget review" means a written document prepared by the committees that
contains an analysis of the budget and the programmatic and fiscal basis of the
agency on which the review is conducted. A zero-base budget review shall
undertake this analysis without regard to the agency's past and current
incremental funding.

(5) "Program"
means a group of agency services designed to accomplish specific public goals
and result in specific public benefits.

(6) "Level of
service" means the relationship between the resources budgeted and the
actual service activity delivered by the authorized service provider or
agency. This relationship is measured in terms such as, but not limited to,
response time, system capacity, application or permit processing time, per
staff workload, and statutory service requirements.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
3. (1) In the omnibus
operating budget bill or in other legislation, the legislature shall identify
agencies on which a zero-base budget review or a modified zero-base budget
review shall be conducted during each fiscal year of the biennium. When
specifying agencies on which the review will be conducted, the legislature
shall seek to complement and avoid duplication of the activities of the
proposed activities of the joint legislative audit and review committee under
chapter 44.28 RCW.

(2) The committees
shall jointly conduct the reviews of state agencies and programs as specified
by the legislature under subsection (1) of this section.

(3) The reviews shall
be provided to the committees either by September 1st following the fiscal
year in which the review takes place, or as specified in the omnibus operating
budget bill or in other legislation.

(4) The house of
representatives and the senate may contract with public and private independent
professional and technical experts as necessary to complete the review.

(5) Each agency
receiving appropriations in the omnibus operating budget bill shall be reviewed
at least once during the six-year period beginning on July 1, 2002, and at
least once every six years thereafter.

(6) When conducting the
review, the committees shall consult with the joint legislative audit and
review committee. The review is intended to complement, and not to duplicate,
performance audits and performance reviews conducted by the joint legislative
audit and review committee under chapter 44.28 RCW.

(7) To facilitate the
review, the director of financial management shall cooperate with the
committees to establish the method and format for the reporting of agency
information. The director of financial management and all agencies shall
comply in a timely manner with requests by the committees for information
related to the review.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
4. A modified zero-base
budget review shall include, but is not limited to, the following:

(1) A statement of the
statutory basis and the history of each program within the agency that is being
reviewed, including the extent to which the program or expenditures are
required by state, federal, or local law;

(2) A description, with
supporting cost and full-time equivalent staff data, of the activities
performed in each program, the specific services provided, and the populations
served by those services;

(3) An analysis of the
major costs and benefits of operating each program within the designated agency
including subprograms within the programs where applicable, and the rationale
for specific expenditure and staffing levels;

(4) An analysis
estimating each program's administrative and other overhead costs;

(5) An analysis of
levels of service provided; and

(6) Where applicable,
an analysis estimating the amount of funds or benefits that actually reach the
intended recipients.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
5. A zero-base budget review
shall include, but is not limited to, each of the components of the modified
zero-base budget review in section 4 of this act in addition to the following:

(1) An analysis of the
quantified objectives of each program within the agency;

(2) An analysis of the
activities that are intended to accomplish these objectives;

(3) Indicators of
quantified measures of effectiveness and efficiency of achievement of these
objectives;

(4) The level of
funding and full-time equivalent staff required to accomplish each activity,
without regard to past incremental levels of funding; and

(5) If the legislation
requiring the review specifies alternate levels of funding for the agency, an
analysis of the agency budget at the different level of funding.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
6. Sections 1 through 5 of
this act constitute a new chapter in Title 44 RCW.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 7. This act takes effect
July 1, 2002.

---
END ---