BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF
WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1. RCW 36.70A.130 and 1997
c 429 s 10 are each amended to read as follows:

(1)(a) Each
comprehensive land use plan and development regulations shall be subject to
continuing review and evaluation by the county or city that adopted them. ((Not
later than September 1, 2002, and at least every five years thereafter,)) A
county or city shall take action to review and, if needed, revise its
comprehensive land use plan and development regulations to ensure ((that))
the plan and regulations ((are complying)) comply with the
requirements of this chapter according to the time periods specified in
subsection (4) of this section and the criteria specified in subsection (5) of
this section. A county or city not planning under RCW 36.70A.040 shall take
action to review and, if needed, revise its policies and development
regulations regarding critical areas and natural resource lands adopted
according to this chapter to ensure these policies and regulations comply with
the requirements of this chapter according to the time periods specified in
subsection (4) of this section. The review and evaluation required by this
subsection may be combined with the review required by subsection (3) of this
section.

(b) Any
amendment of or revision to a comprehensive land use plan shall conform
to this chapter((, and any change)). Any amendment of or revision
to development regulations shall be consistent with and implement the
comprehensive plan.

(2)(a) Each county and
city shall establish and broadly disseminate to the public a public
participation program identifying procedures whereby proposed amendments or
revisions of the comprehensive plan are considered by the governing body of the
county or city no more frequently than once every year ((except that)).
Amendments may be considered more frequently than once per year
under the following circumstances:

(i) The initial
adoption of a subarea plan;

(ii) The adoption or
amendment of a shoreline master program under the procedures set forth in
chapter 90.58 RCW; and

(iii) The amendment of
the capital facilities element of a comprehensive plan that occurs concurrently
with the adoption or amendment of a county or city budget.

(b) Except as otherwise
provided in (a) of this subsection, all proposals shall be considered by the
governing body concurrently so the cumulative effect of the various proposals
can be ascertained. However, after appropriate public participation a county
or city may adopt amendments or revisions to its comprehensive plan that
conform with this chapter whenever an emergency exists or to resolve an appeal
of a comprehensive plan filed with a growth management hearings board or with
the court.

(3) Each county that
designates urban growth areas under RCW 36.70A.110 shall review, at least every
ten years, its designated urban growth area or areas, and the densities
permitted within both the incorporated and unincorporated portions of each
urban growth area. In conjunction with this review by the county, each city
located within an urban growth area shall review the densities permitted within
its boundaries, and the extent to which the urban growth occurring within the
county has located within each city and the unincorporated portions of the
urban growth areas. The county comprehensive plan designating urban growth
areas, and the densities permitted in the urban growth areas by the
comprehensive plans of the county and each city located within the urban growth
areas, shall be revised to accommodate the urban growth projected to occur in
the county for the succeeding twenty-year period. The review required by this
subsection may be combined with the review and evaluation required by RCW
36.70A.215.

(4) The department
shall establish a schedule for counties and cities to conduct the review and
evaluation required by subsection (1) of this section. The schedule
established by the department shall provide for the reviews and evaluations to
be completed as follows:

(a) On or before
July 1, 2004, and every ten years thereafter, for Clark, King, Kitsap, Pierce,
Snohomish, and Thurston counties and the cities within those counties;

(b) On or before
December 1, 2004, and every ten years thereafter, for Clallam, Jefferson, and
Whatcom counties and the cities within those counties;

(c) On or before
December 1, 2005, and every ten years thereafter, for Cowlitz, Island, Lewis,
Mason, San Juan, Skagit, and Skamania counties and the cities within those
counties;

(d) On or before
December 1, 2006, and every ten years thereafter, for Benton, Chelan, Douglas,
Grant, Kittitas, Spokane, and Yakima counties and the cities within those
counties; and

(e) On or before
December 1, 2007, and every ten years thereafter, for Adams, Asotin, Columbia,
Ferry, Franklin, Garfield, Grays Harbor, Klickitat, Lincoln, Okanogan, Pacific,
Pend Oreille, Stevens, Wahkiakum, Walla Walla, and Whitman counties and the
cities within those counties.

(5) No county may be
required to review or revise its comprehensive plan and development regulations
under subsections (1) and (4) of this section unless the following criteria are
met:

(a) The unemployment
rate for the county is lower than six percent as determined by the Washington
state employment security department;

(b) The median
household income of the county is at least forty-five percent of the median
household income for Washington state as determined by the office of financial
management;

(c) The county
retail taxable sales per capita, as determined by the department of revenue
using population figures determined by the office of financial management, are
at least forty-five percent of the median county taxable retail sales per
capita in Washington state.

(6) Nothing in this
section precludes a county or city from conducting the review and evaluation
required by this section before the time limits established in subsection (4)
of this section. Counties and cities may begin this process early and may be
eligible for grants from the department, subject to available funding, if they
elect to do so.

(7) A
county or city subject to the time periods in subsection (4)(a) of this section
that, pursuant to an ordinance adopted by the county or city establishing a
schedule for periodic review of its comprehensive plan and development
regulations, has conducted a review and evaluation of its comprehensive plan
and development regulations and, on or after January 1, 2001, has taken action
in response to that review and evaluation shall be deemed to have conducted the
first review required by subsection (4)(a) of this section. Subsequent review
and evaluation by the county or city of its comprehensive plan and development
regulations shall be conducted in accordance with the time periods established
under subsection (4)(a) of this section.

--- END ---