BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF
WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec.
1. A new section is added
to chapter 82.08 RCW to read as follows:

(1) The tax levied by
RCW 82.08.020 does not apply to sales of articles of tangible personal property
or construction services purchased for research and development purposes by a
university.

(2) The definitions in
this subsection apply for the purposes of this section and section 2 of this
act.

(a) "Construction
service" means any sale or charge made for tangible personal property
consumed or for labor and services rendered in respect to any activity
specified in RCW 82.04.050(2) (b) or (c).

(b) "Research and
development" has the meaning provided in RCW 82.63.010.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
2. A new section is added
to chapter 82.12 RCW to read as follows:

(1) The provisions of
this chapter do not apply in respect to the use of tangible personal property
acquired for research and development purposes by a university.

(2) The definitions in
section 1 of this act apply to this section.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 3. This act takes effect
July 1, 2002.

---
END ---