BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF
WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec.
1. A new section is added
to chapter 82.32 RCW to read as follows:

All revenue from the
taxes imposed under chapter 82.08 or 82.12 RCW upon the sale or use of
newspapers must be used solely for the support of the state library or for the
support of reading programs under the office of the superintendent of public
instruction.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
2. RCW 82.08.0253 (Exemptions--Sale and
distribution of newspapers) and 1980 c 37 s 21 are each repealed.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 3. This act takes effect
July 1, 2002.

---
END ---