BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF
WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec.
1. The legislature
recognizes the fiscal impact the proposed nuclear waste treatment and
immobilization plant at Hanford will have on local government operations from
the influx of thousands of workers constructing the plant. The legislature
further recognizes that the facility will be located on federal land, which is
exempt from property taxation. Therefore, the local governments have limited tax
sources to offset these increased costs. It is the intent of the legislature
to create a special impact mitigation assistance program funded by a portion of
the state business and occupation tax collected from the prime contractor on
the construction of the project.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
2. A new section is added
to chapter 82.32 RCW to read as follows:

(1) As provided in
subsection (2) of this section, a portion of the business and occupation tax
imposed under chapter 82.04 RCW and remitted by the prime contractor
responsible for the construction and/or commissioning of a nuclear waste
treatment and immobilization plant shall be deposited into the nuclear waste
mitigation account created in section 3 of this act.

(2)(a) Beginning July
1, 2002, and ending no later than December 31, 2012, the department shall make
the deposits to the nuclear waste mitigation account under this section based
on an estimate submitted by the prime contractor, in a form and manner prescribed
by the department, of the tax remitted to the department by the prime
contractor attributable to the contract for construction and/or commissioning
of a nuclear waste treatment and immobilization plant.

(b) Deposits into the
account under this section may not exceed two million dollars in any one year.
Total deposits into the account may not exceed ten million dollars overall.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
3. A new section is added
to chapter 70.99 RCW to read as follows:

The nuclear waste
mitigation account is created in the custody of the state treasurer. Receipts
from section 2 of this act must be deposited into the account. The state
treasurer shall annually distribute the money in the account to the county or
counties where construction takes place. Money received by a county or
counties must be distributed by the county or counties to local governments
using a formula devised by the Hanford communities organization, created
pursuant to interlocal agreement under chapter 39.34 RCW. Only the state
treasurer may authorize the annual distributions from this account. The
account is subject to allotment procedures under chapter 43.88 RCW, but an
appropriation is not required for expenditures. Notwithstanding the provisions
of RCW 43.84.092, investment earnings on the funds shall be deposited into the
nuclear waste mitigation account.

Sec. 4. RCW 43.79A.040 and 2001
c 201 s 4 and 2001 c 184 s 4 are each reenacted and amended to read as follows:

(1) Money in the
treasurer's trust fund may be deposited, invested, and reinvested by the state
treasurer in accordance with RCW 43.84.080 in the same manner and to the same
extent as if the money were in the state treasury.

(2) All income received
from investment of the treasurer's trust fund shall be set aside in an account
in the treasury trust fund to be known as the investment income account.

(3) The investment
income account may be utilized for the payment of purchased banking services on
behalf of treasurer's trust funds including, but not limited to, depository,
safekeeping, and disbursement functions for the state treasurer or affected
state agencies. The investment income account is subject in all respects to
chapter 43.88 RCW, but no appropriation is required for payments to financial
institutions. Payments shall occur prior to distribution of earnings set forth
in subsection (4) of this section.

(4)(a) Monthly, the
state treasurer shall distribute the earnings credited to the investment income
account to the state general fund except under (b) and (c) of this subsection.

(b) The following
accounts and funds shall receive their proportionate share of earnings based
upon each account's or fund's average daily balance for the period: The
college savings program account, the Washington advanced college tuition
payment program account, the agricultural local fund, the American Indian
scholarship endowment fund, the basic health plan self-insurance reserve
account, the Washington international exchange scholarship endowment fund, the
developmental disabilities endowment trust fund, the energy account, the fair
fund, the game farm alternative account, the grain inspection revolving fund,
the juvenile accountability incentive account, the nuclear waste mitigation
account, the rural rehabilitation account, the stadium and exhibition
center account, the youth athletic facility account, the self-insurance
revolving fund, the sulfur dioxide abatement account, and the children's trust
fund. However, the earnings to be distributed shall first be reduced by the
allocation to the state treasurer's service fund pursuant to RCW 43.08.190.

(c) The following
accounts and funds shall receive eighty percent of their proportionate share of
earnings based upon each account's or fund's average daily balance for the
period: The advanced right of way revolving fund, the advanced environmental
mitigation revolving account, the city and county advance right-of-way
revolving fund, the federal narcotics asset forfeitures account, the high
occupancy vehicle account, the local rail service assistance account, and the
miscellaneous transportation programs account.

(5) In conformance with
Article II, section 37 of the state Constitution, no trust accounts or funds
shall be allocated earnings without the specific affirmative directive of this
section.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 5. This act takes effect
July 1, 2002.

---
END ---