BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF
WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1. RCW 46.16.230 and 1992 c
7 s 41 are each amended to read as follows:

The director shall
furnish to all persons making satisfactory application for vehicle license as
provided by law, two identical vehicle license number plates each containing
the vehicle license number to be displayed on such vehicle as by law required:
PROVIDED, That if the vehicle to be licensed is a commercial vehicle with a
gross weight in excess of 26,000 pounds, trailer, semitrailer, or
motorcycle only one vehicle license number plate shall be issued for each
thereof. The number and plate shall be of such size and color and shall
contain such symbols indicative of the registration period for which the same
is issued and of the state of Washington, as shall be determined and prescribed
by the director. Any vehicle license number plate or plates issued to a dealer
shall contain thereon a sufficient and satisfactory indication that such plates
have been issued to a dealer in vehicles. All vehicle license number plates
may be obtained by the director from the metal working plant of a state
correctional facility or from any source in accordance with existing state of
Washington purchasing procedures.

Notwithstanding the
foregoing provisions of this section, the director may, in his discretion and
under such rules and regulations as he may prescribe, adopt a type of vehicle
license number plates whereby the same shall be used as long as legible on the
vehicle for which issued, with provision for tabs or emblems to be attached
thereto or elsewhere on the vehicle to signify renewals, in which event the
term "vehicle license number plate" as used in any enactment shall be
deemed to include in addition to such plate the tab or emblem signifying
renewal except when such plate contains the designation of the current year
without reference to any tab or emblem. Renewals shall be effected by the
issuance and display of such tab or emblem.

Sec. 2. RCW 46.16.240 and 1987 c
330 s 704 and 1987 c 142 s 3 are each reenacted and amended to read as follows:

(1) The vehicle
license number plates shall be attached conspicuously at the front and rear of
each vehicle for which the same are issued and in such a manner that they can
be plainly seen and read at all times: PROVIDED, That if only one license
number plate is legally issued for any vehicle such plate shall be
conspicuously attached to the rear of such vehicle, except that commercial
vehicles with a gross weight in excess of 26,000 pounds must attach their
single license number plate only on the front of the vehicle.

(2) Each vehicle
license number plate shall be placed or hung in a horizontal position at a
distance of not less than one foot nor more than four feet from the ground and
shall be kept clean so as to be plainly seen and read at all times: PROVIDED,
HOWEVER, That in cases where the body construction of the vehicle is such that
compliance with this section is impossible, permission to deviate therefrom may
be granted by the state patrol.

(3) It shall be
unlawful to display upon the front or rear of any vehicle, vehicle license
number plate or plates other than those furnished by the director for such
vehicle or to display upon any vehicle any vehicle license number plate or
plates which have been in any manner changed, altered, disfigured or have
become illegible.

(4) License
plate frames may be used on vehicle license number plates only if the frames do
not obscure license tabs or identifying letters or numbers on the plates and
the plates can be plainly seen and read at all times. It is unlawful to use
any holders, frames, or any materials that in any manner change, alter, or make
the vehicle license number plates illegible.

(5)
It shall be unlawful for any person to operate any vehicle unless there shall
be displayed thereon valid vehicle license number plates attached as herein
provided.

---
END ---