BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF
WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1. RCW 42.52.180 and 1995 c
397 s 30 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) No state officer or
state employee may use or authorize the use of facilities of an agency,
directly or indirectly, for the purpose of assisting a campaign for election of
a person to an office or for the promotion of or opposition to a ballot
proposition. Knowing acquiescence by a person with authority to direct,
control, or influence the actions of the state officer or state employee using
public resources in violation of this section constitutes a violation of this
section. Facilities of an agency include, but are not limited to, use of
stationery, postage, machines, and equipment, use of state employees of the
agency during working hours, vehicles, office space, publications of the
agency, and clientele lists of persons served by the agency.

(2) This section shall
not apply to the following activities:

(a) Action taken at an
open public meeting by members of an elected legislative body to express a
collective decision, or to actually vote upon a motion, proposal, resolution,
order, or ordinance, or to support or oppose a ballot proposition as long as
(i) required notice of the meeting includes the title and number of the ballot
proposition, and (ii) members of the legislative body or members of the public
are afforded an approximately equal opportunity for the expression of an
opposing view;

(b) A statement by an
elected official in support of or in opposition to any ballot proposition at an
open press conference or in response to a specific inquiry. For the purposes
of this subsection, it is not a violation of this section for an elected
official to respond to an inquiry regarding a ballot proposition, to make
incidental remarks concerning a ballot proposition in an official
communication, or otherwise comment on a ballot proposition without an actual,
measurable expenditure of public funds. The ethics boards shall adopt by rule
a definition of measurable expenditure;

(c) Activities that are
part of the normal and regular conduct of the office or agency.
"Normal and regular conduct" for a legislator includes discussing a
ballot proposition placed on the ballot by the legislature. Legislators are
permitted to discuss such a ballot measure, including its merits and demerits.
Legislators may state their position on such a ballot measure, including
advocacy expressions of support or opposition. Such discussions are permitted
in all manner of communications, whether initiated by the legislator or in
response to an inquiry, and including newsletters, letters, press releases, and
public meetings undertaken in the conduct of the official's office; and

(d) De minimis use of
public facilities by state-wide elected officials and legislators incidental to
the preparation or delivery of permissible communications, including written
and verbal communications initiated by them of their views on ballot
propositions that foreseeably may affect a matter that falls within their
constitutional or statutory responsibilities.

(3) As to
state officers and employees, this section operates to the exclusion of RCW
42.17.130.

--- END ---