BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF
WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec.
1. A new section is added
to chapter 9.91 RCW to read as follows:

(1) A person is guilty
of fiscal note fraud if he or she knowingly or intentionally makes a false
statement by submitting an over-estimated fiscal note to any member or staff of
the house of representatives or senate.

(2) Fiscal note fraud
is punishable as a class C felony under chapter 9A.20 RCW.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 2. This act is necessary for
the immediate preservation of the public peace, health, or safety, or support
of the state government and its existing public institutions, and takes effect
immediately.

---
END ---