BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF
WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec.
1. A new section is added
to chapter 67.70 RCW to read as follows:

(1) The commission may
initiate a game or games using video devices.

(2) In the approval and
purchase of video lottery games, game terminals, and equipment, the commission
and any game operator, distributor, retailer, or owner shall prefer goods or
services that have been manufactured in this state if price, fitness, and
quality are otherwise equal.

(3) The commission
shall separately record and account for the costs and net proceeds of games
operated under this section. At the time the state treasurer makes the
quarterly transfer of net proceeds provided for under RCW 67.70.200, the
commission shall certify to the treasurer the amount of the transfer which
represents the net proceeds of games provided for in subsection (1) of this
section.

(4) Video lottery
terminals operated under authority of the commission are specifically exempted
from the provisions of 15 U.S.C. Sec. 1172.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
2. A new section is added
to chapter 67.70 RCW to read as follows:

(1) A video lottery
game terminal that offers a video lottery game authorized by the director may
not be placed for operation except on the premises of an establishment that has
entered into contract with the director to provide video lottery game
services. The terminal must be within the control of an employee of the video
lottery game retailer.

(2) A video lottery
game terminal that offers a video lottery game authorized by the director may
not be placed for operation except on the premises of an establishment licensed
by the state liquor control board to sell alcoholic beverages for consumption
on the premises. A video lottery game terminal may not be placed in any part
of the premises that is not restricted to persons of age twenty-one and older.

(3) The number of video
lottery machines that may be placed on the premises described in subsection (2)
of this section is limited as follows:

(a) For an
establishment licensed by the state liquor control board to sell alcoholic
beverages under RCW 66.24.330, no more than ten machines;

(b) For commercial
operators licensed by the gambling commission under chapter 9.46 RCW to conduct
social card games, no more than one hundred machines; and

(c) For an establishment
or operator other than those specifically enumerated in this section, no more
than five machines.

(4) The director may
not allow licensees to operate more than five thousand terminals statewide.

Sec. 3. RCW 67.70.040 and 1994 c
218 s 4 are each amended to read as follows:

The commission shall
have the power, and it shall be its duty:

(1) To promulgate such
rules governing the establishment and operation of a state lottery as it deems
necessary and desirable in order that such a lottery be initiated at the
earliest feasible and practicable time, and in order that such lottery produce
the maximum amount of net revenues for the state consonant with the dignity of
the state and the general welfare of the people. Such rules shall include, but
shall not be limited to, the following:

(a) The type of lottery
to be conducted which may include the selling of tickets or shares. ((The
use of electronic or mechanical devices or video terminals which allow for
individual play against such devices or terminals shall be prohibited.))
Approval of the legislature shall be required before entering any agreement
with other state lotteries to conduct shared games;

(b) The price, or
prices, of tickets or shares in the lottery;

(c) The numbers and
sizes of the prizes on the winning tickets or shares;

(d) The manner of
selecting the winning tickets or shares;

(e) The manner and time
of payment of prizes to the holder of winning tickets or shares which, at the
director's option, may be paid in lump sum amounts or installments over a
period of years;

(f) The frequency of
the drawings or selections of winning tickets or shares. With the exception
of video lottery games as authorized under section 1 of this act, approval
of the legislature is required before conducting any on-line game in which the
drawing or selection of winning tickets occurs more frequently than once every
twenty-four hours;

(g) Without limit as to
number, the type or types of locations at which tickets or shares may be sold;

(h) The method to be
used in selling tickets or shares;

(i) The licensing of
agents to sell or distribute tickets or shares, except that a person under the
age of eighteen shall not be licensed as an agent;

(j) The manner and
amount of compensation, if any, to be paid licensed sales agents necessary to
provide for the adequate availability of tickets or shares to prospective
buyers and for the convenience of the public;

(k) The apportionment
of the total revenues accruing from the sale of lottery tickets or shares and
from all other sources among: (i) The payment of prizes to the holders of
winning tickets or shares, which shall not be less than forty-five percent of
the gross annual revenue from such lottery, (ii) transfers to the lottery
administrative account created by RCW 67.70.260, and (iii) transfer to the
state's general fund. Transfers to the state general fund shall be made in
compliance with RCW 43.01.050;

(l) Such other matters
necessary or desirable for the efficient and economical operation and
administration of the lottery and for the convenience of the purchasers of
tickets or shares and the holders of winning tickets or shares.

(2) To ensure that in
each place authorized to sell lottery tickets or shares, on the back of the
ticket or share, and in any advertising or promotion there shall be
conspicuously displayed an estimate of the probability of purchasing a winning
ticket.

(3) To amend, repeal,
or supplement any such rules from time to time as it deems necessary or
desirable.

(4) To advise and make
recommendations to the director for the operation and administration of the
lottery.

Sec. 4. RCW 67.70.200 and 1987 c
511 s 9 are each amended to read as follows:

The director, in his or
her discretion, may require any or all lottery sales agents to deposit ((to
the credit of the state lottery account)) in banks designated by the state
treasurer, all moneys received by such agents from the sale of lottery tickets
or shares, less the amount, if any, retained as compensation for the sale of
the tickets or shares((, and)). Money from the sale of lottery tickets
or shares for video lottery games shall be deposited to the credit of the video
lottery game account. Money from the sales of lottery tickets or shares for
all other games shall be deposited to the credit of the state lottery account.
The director may also require lottery sales agents to file with the
director or his or her designated agents, reports of their receipts and
transactions in the sale of lottery tickets in such form and containing such
information as he or she may require. The director may make such
arrangements for any person, including a bank, to perform such functions,
activities, or services in connection with the operation of the lottery as he
or she may deem advisable pursuant to this chapter and the rules of the
commission, and such functions, activities, or services shall constitute lawful
functions, activities, and services of such person.

Sec. 5. RCW 67.70.230 and 1985 c
375 s 4 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) There is
hereby created and established a separate account, to be known as the state
lottery account. Such account shall be managed, maintained, and controlled by
the commission and shall consist of all ((revenues received from the sale of
lottery tickets or shares)) moneys credited to the account under RCW
67.70.200, and all other moneys credited or transferred thereto from any
other fund or source pursuant to law. The account shall be a separate account
outside the state treasury. No appropriation is required to permit expenditures
and payment of obligations from the account.

(2) There is hereby
created and established a separate account, to be known as the video lottery
game account. Such account shall be managed, maintained, and controlled by the
commission and shall consist of all moneys credited to the account under RCW
67.70.200 and all other moneys credited or transferred thereto from any other
fund or source pursuant to law. The account shall be a separate account
outside the state treasury. No appropriation is required to permit
expenditures and payment of obligations from the account.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
6. A new section is added
to chapter 67.70 RCW to read as follows:

Money in the video
lottery game account shall be used only:

(1) For the payment of
prizes to the holders of winning video lottery tickets or shares;

(2) For purposes of
making deposits into the lottery administrative account created by RCW
67.70.260;

(3) For the purchase
and promotion of video lottery games and game-related services;

(4) For the payment of
agent compensation; and

(5) For purposes of
making deposits into the student achievement fund and the new twenty-first
century account created under section 7 of this act. The treasurer shall
transfer money in the account not otherwise obligated under subsections (1)
through (4) of this section, to these funds, as follows:

(a) For the student
achievement fund, the treasurer shall transfer sufficient money, as available,
from the video lottery game account to meet the per student state funding
criterion for the maintenance and operation of K-12 education provided under
RCW 43.135.045(3);

(b) For the new
twenty-first century account, if the criterion under (a) of this subsection has
been met, the treasurer shall transfer all remaining money in the video lottery
game account.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
7. A new section is added
to chapter 28B.80 RCW to read as follows:

(1) The new
twenty-first century account is created in the state treasury. The account
shall consist of all money transferred to the account under section 6 of this
act and all other money credited or transferred from any other fund or source
pursuant to law. Money in the account may be spent only after appropriation.

(2) Expenditures from
the new twenty-first century account may not be used for any purpose except the
following:

(a) To provide funding
for the Washington promise scholarship program;

(b) To provide funding
for state need grants;

(c) To help fund high
demand enrollments; and

(d) To fund other
financial aid and assistance programs at institutions of higher education as
defined in chapter 28B.10 RCW.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
8. A new section is added
to chapter 67.70 RCW to read as follows:

(1) Upon the request of
the commission or the director, the attorney general and the state patrol shall
furnish to the director information that may assure security, integrity, honesty,
and fairness in the operation and administration of video lottery games as the
attorney general and the state patrol may have in their possession, including,
but not limited to, manual or computerized information and data.

(2) In order to
determine an applicant's suitability to enter into a contract with the lottery
to operate video lottery games, each applicant shall be fingerprinted. The
director shall submit to the United States department of justice-federal bureau
of investigation, for the purpose of verifying the identity of the following
persons and conducting national criminal history background checks,
fingerprints of each person for whom section 9 of this act or an administrative
rule of the commission requires disclosure of the person's name and address.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
9. A new section is added
to chapter 67.70 RCW to read as follows:

(1) The commission
shall adopt rules specifying the terms and conditions for contracting with
video lottery game retailers to provide adequate and convenient availability of
tickets or shares to prospective buyers of each video lottery game as
appropriate for each game. The foregoing does not preclude the lottery from
selling tickets or shares directly to the public.

(2)(a) The director
shall, pursuant to this chapter, and the rules of the commission, select as
video lottery game retailers persons deemed to best serve the public
convenience and promote the sale of tickets or shares. No person under the age
of eighteen shall be a video lottery game retailer. In the selection of a
video lottery game retailer, the director shall consider factors such as
financial responsibility, integrity, reputation, accessibility of the place of
business or activity to the public, security of the premises, the sufficiency
of existing video lottery game retailers for any particular video lottery game
to serve the public convenience, and the projected volume of sales for the
video lottery game involved.

(b) Prior to the
execution of any contract with a video lottery game retailer, the video lottery
game retailer shall disclose to the lottery the names and addresses of the
following:

(i) If the video
lottery game retailer is a corporation, but not a private club as described
under chapter 66.24 RCW, the officers, directors, and each stockholder in the
corporation except that, in the case of stockholders of publicly held equity
securities of a publicly traded corporation, only the names and addresses of
those known to the corporation to beneficially own five percent or more of the
securities need be disclosed;

(ii) If the video
lottery game retailer is a trust, the trustee and all persons entitled to
receive income or benefit from the trust;

(iii) If the video
lottery game retailer is an association, but not a private club as described in
chapter 66.24 RCW, the members, officers, and directors;

(iv) If the video
lottery game retailer is a subsidiary, but not a private club as described in
chapter 66.24 RCW, the officers, directors, and each stockholder of the parent
corporation except that, in the case of stockholders of publicly held equity
securities of a publicly traded corporation, only the names and addresses of
those known to the corporation to beneficially own five percent or more of the
securities need be disclosed;

(v) If the video
lottery game retailer is a partnership or joint venture, all of the general
partners, limited partners, or joint venturers;

(vi) If the parent
company, general partner, limited partner, or joint venturer of any video
lottery game retailer is itself a corporation, trust association, subsidiary,
partnership, or joint venturer, then all of the information required in this
section shall be disclosed for the other entity as if it were itself a video
lottery game retailer to the end that full disclosure of ultimate ownership be
achieved;

(vii) If any member,
eighteen years of age or older, of the immediate family of any video lottery
game retailer, or any member, eighteen years of age or older, of the immediate
family of any individual whose name is required to be disclosed under this
subsection (2)(b), is involved in the video lottery game retailer's business in
any capacity, then all of the information required in this section shall be
disclosed for the immediate family member as if the family member were a video
lottery game retailer;

(viii) If the video
lottery game retailer is a private club as described in chapter 66.24 RCW, the
treasurer, officers, directors, and trustees who oversee or direct the
operation of the food, beverage, video lottery, or other gambling-related
activities of the private club and each manager in charge of the food,
beverage, video lottery, or other gambling-related activities of the private
club.

(c) The director may
require full disclosure of any immediate family member of any video lottery
game retailer who is involved in the video lottery game retailer's business as
if the family member were a video lottery game retailer if the director has just
cause to believe the family member may be a threat to the integrity, honesty,
fairness, or security of the lottery and its games.

(d) The commission may
refuse to grant a video lottery game retail contract to any video lottery game
retailer or any natural person whose name is required to be disclosed under (b)
of this subsection, who has been convicted of violating any gambling laws of
this state, general or local, or has been convicted at any time of any crime.
The lottery may require payment by each video lottery game retailer to the
lottery of an initial nonrefundable application fee or an annual fee, or both,
to maintain the contract to be a video lottery game retailer.

(e) No person shall be
a video lottery game retailer who is engaged exclusively in the business of
selling video lottery tickets or shares. A person lawfully engaged in
nongovernmental business on state or political subdivision property or an owner
or lessee of a premises which lawfully sells alcoholic beverages may be
selected as a video lottery game retailer. State agencies, except for the
state lottery, political subdivisions, or their agencies or departments may not
be selected as a video lottery game retailer. The director may contract with
video lottery game retailers on a permanent, seasonal, or temporary basis.

(3) The authority to
act as a video lottery game retailer shall not be assignable or transferable.

(4) The director may
terminate a contract with a video lottery game retailer for reasons of
termination, as provided in the contract, which may include, but not be limited
to, the knowing sale of video lottery tickets or shares to any person under the
age of eighteen years.

(5) Notwithstanding
subsection (4) of this section, when a video lottery game retail contract requires
the video lottery game retailer to maintain a minimum weekly sales average, the
video lottery game retailer may avoid termination of the contract for failure
to meet the minimum weekly sales average by agreeing, prior to termination, to
pay the state lottery the difference between the actual weekly cost incurred by
the lottery to maintain the contract and the weekly proceeds that are collected
by the lottery from the sales of that video lottery game retailer, less
expenses that are dedicated by statute, rule, or contract to other purposes.
The director may not terminate the contract of a video lottery game retailer
for failure to meet a minimum weekly sales average unless the director first
allows the video lottery game retailer an opportunity to make the payment
described in this subsection.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 10. This act takes effect
July 1, 2002.

---
END ---