BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF
WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec.
1. A new section is added
to chapter 28A.150 RCW to read as follows:

In order that the right
of every pupil to the free exercise of religion be guaranteed within the
schools and that the freedom of each individual pupil be subject to the least
possible pressure from the state either to engage in, or to refrain from,
religious observation on school grounds, the school board of each school
district shall establish the daily observance of one minute of silence in each
classroom of the district.

During
such one-minute period of silence, the teacher responsible for each classroom
shall take care that all pupils remain seated and silent and make no
distracting display to the end that each pupil may, in the exercise of his or
her individual choice, meditate, pray, or engage in any other silent activity
that does not interfere with, distract, or impede other pupils in the like
exercise of individual choice.

--- END ---