BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF
WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec.
1. A new section is added
to chapter 82.16 RCW to read as follows:

(1) Subject to the
limitations in this section, a credit is allowed to an eligible transportation
provider against the tax due under this chapter for the transportation costs of
natural or manufactured gas that is purchased by an eligible transportation
provider to use as vehicular fuel.

(2) The credit provided
under this section is an amount equal to the cost to the eligible
transportation provider for the transportation of the gas, exclusive of tax
paid under this chapter by the seller on the amount derived from the
transportation, multiplied by the rate in effect for gas distribution
businesses under RCW 82.16.020.

(3) Credit under this
section is limited to the amount of tax imposed under this chapter. Refunds
shall not be given in place of credits and credits may not be carried over to
subsequent calendar years.

(4) For the purposes of
this section, an "eligible transportation provider" means:

(a) An urban passenger
transportation system or carrier entitled to a refund or an exemption under RCW
82.38.080(3); or

(b) A
private, nonprofit transportation provider certified under chapter 81.66 RCW
and entitled to a refund or an exemption under RCW 82.38.080(1)(h).

--- END ---