BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF
WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec.
1. A new section is added
to chapter 28A.320 RCW to read as follows:

The definitions in this
section apply throughout this title.

(1)
"Administrative employees" or "administrative staff"
includes but is not limited to: Chief executive officers; chief administrative
officers; business officers; the directors of human resources, facilities,
transportation, and education; confidential employees; and supervisors within
the definition in RCW 41.59.020(4). Principals and vice-principals are not
included in this definition.

(a) Administrative
employees are persons who have been employed by a county school administrative
cooperative to perform administrative functions for one or more school
districts under the jurisdiction of the county school administrative cooperative.

(b) Administrative
employees do not include employees of educational service districts.

(2) "Assistant
superintendent" means a person who has been employed by a county school
administrative cooperative to assist the superintendent hired by the cooperative
and is not an assistant superintendent of an educational service district or of
the office of the superintendent of public instruction.

(3) "County school
administrative cooperative" or "cooperative" means an
organization governed by one school director from each school district that is
entirely contained within the boundaries of a county and of each school
district that has a majority of its school buildings located within that
county. Each school district board of directors shall determine the manner in
which the director is selected.

(4)
"Superintendent" means a person who:

(a) Is the chief
executive officer for every school district that is entirely contained within
the boundaries of a county and for every school district that has a majority of
its school buildings located within that county;

(b) Has been employed
by a county school administrative cooperative; and

(c) Is not the
superintendent of public instruction or the superintendent of an educational
service district or the superintendent of a school district that fully funds
all costs for school administrative personnel out of nonstate funds.

(5) The definitions in
this section do not apply to administrative personnel of any school district
that fully funds all costs for school administrative personnel out of nonstate
funds.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
2. A new section is added
to chapter 28A.320 RCW to read as follows:

The duties of a county
school administrative cooperative include but are not limited to:

(1) The employment of a
superintendent, one or more assistant superintendents, and one or more
administrative employees or administrative staff, who shall be hired by a
majority vote of the county school administrative cooperative directors and who
shall provide or supervise all administrative functions for every school
district under the jurisdiction of the county school administrative
cooperative;

(2) The employment, in
consultation with the applicable school district, of certificated instructional
staff, classified staff, and any other necessary employees for each school
district under the jurisdiction of the county school administrative
cooperative;

(3) The provision of
all administrative functions for every school district within the jurisdiction
of the county school administrative cooperative;

(4) The requirement of
the officers or employees of each school district under the jurisdiction of the
county school administrative cooperative to give a bond for the honest
performance of their duties in such penal sum as may be fixed by the
cooperative with good and sufficient surety, and to cause the premium for all
bonds required of all such officers or employees to be paid by the district.
The cooperative may, by written policy, allow that such bonds include a
deductible proviso not to exceed two percent of the officer's or employee's
annual salary.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
3. A new section is added
to chapter 28A.150 RCW to read as follows:

Administrative
employees and administrative staff are not included in the definition or
funding of basic education. Funding levels for the number and compensation
levels of administrative employees are entirely at the discretion of the
legislature.

Sec. 4. RCW 28A.150.080 and 1969
ex.s. c 223 s 28A.01.100 are each amended to read as follows:

"Superintendent of
the school district", if there be no such superintendent, shall mean such
other administrative or certificated employee as the county school ((district
board of directors)) administrative cooperative shall so designate.

Sec. 5. RCW 28A.150.230 and 1994
c 245 s 9 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) It is the intent
and purpose of this section to guarantee that each common school district board
of directors((, whether or not acting through its respective administrative
staff,)) be held accountable for the proper operation of their district to
the local community and its electorate. In accordance with the provisions of
Title 28A RCW, as now or hereafter amended, each common school district board
of directors shall be vested with the final responsibility for the setting of
policies ensuring quality in the content and extent of its educational program
and that such program provide students with the opportunity to achieve those
skills which are generally recognized as requisite to learning.

(2) In conformance with
the provisions of Title 28A RCW, as now or hereafter amended, it shall be the
responsibility of each common school district board of directors to adopt
policies to:

(a) Establish
performance criteria and an evaluation process for its certificated personnel((,
including administrative staff,)) and for all programs constituting a part
of such district's curriculum;

(b) Determine the final
assignment of staff, certificated or classified, according to board enumerated
classroom and program needs;

(c) Determine the
amount of instructional hours necessary for any student to acquire a quality
education in such district, in not less than an amount otherwise required in
RCW 28A.150.220, or rules ((and regulations)) of the state board of
education;

(d) Determine the
allocation of staff time, whether certificated or classified;

(e) Establish final
curriculum standards consistent with law and rules ((and regulations))
of the state board of education, relevant to the particular needs of district
students or the unusual characteristics of the district, and ensuring a quality
education for each student in the district; and

(f) Evaluate teaching
materials, including text books, teaching aids, handouts, or other printed
material, in public hearing upon complaint by parents, guardians or custodians
of students who consider dissemination of such material to students objectionable.

Sec. 6. RCW 28A.150.260 and 1997
c 13 s 2 are each amended to read as follows:

The basic education
allocation for each annual average full time equivalent student shall be
determined in accordance with the following procedures:

(1) The governor shall
and the superintendent of public instruction may recommend to the legislature a
formula based on a ratio of students to staff for the distribution of a basic
education allocation for each annual average full time equivalent student
enrolled in a common school. The distribution formula shall have the primary
objective of equalizing educational opportunities and shall provide appropriate
recognition of the following costs among the various districts within the
state:

(a) Certificated
instructional staff, which shall include principals and vice-principals,
and their related costs;

(b) ((Certificated
administrative staff and their related costs;

(c))) Classified staff and their related costs;

(((d))) (c)
Nonsalary costs;

(((e))) (d)
Extraordinary costs of remote and necessary schools and small high schools,
including costs of additional certificated and classified staff; and

(((f))) (e)
The attendance of students pursuant to RCW 28A.335.160 and 28A.225.250 who do
not reside within the servicing school district.

(2)(a) This formula for
distribution of basic education funds shall be reviewed biennially by the
superintendent and governor. The recommended formula shall be subject to
approval, amendment or rejection by the legislature. The formula shall be for
allocation purposes only. ((While)) The legislature intends that
the allocations for additional instructional staff be used to increase the ratio
of such staff to students((, nothing in this section shall require districts
to reduce the number of administrative staff below existing levels)).

(b) The formula adopted
by the legislature shall reflect the following ratios at a minimum: (i) Forty-nine
certificated instructional staff, which shall include principals and
vice-principals, to one thousand annual average full time equivalent
students enrolled in grades kindergarten through three; (ii) forty-six
certificated instructional staff to one thousand annual average full time
equivalent students in grades four through twelve; and (iii) ((four
certificated administrative staff to one thousand annual average full time
equivalent students in grades kindergarten through twelve; and (iv)))
sixteen and sixty-seven one-hundredths classified personnel to one thousand
annual average full time equivalent students enrolled in grades kindergarten
through twelve.

(c) In the event the
legislature rejects the distribution formula recommended by the governor,
without adopting a new distribution formula, the distribution formula for the
previous school year shall remain in effect: PROVIDED, That the distribution
formula developed pursuant to this section shall be for state apportionment and
equalization purposes only and shall not be construed as mandating specific
operational functions of local school districts other than those program
requirements identified in RCW 28A.150.220 and 28A.150.100. The enrollment of
any district shall be the annual average number of full time equivalent
students and part time students as provided in RCW 28A.150.350, enrolled on the
first school day of each month and shall exclude full time equivalent students
with disabilities recognized for the purposes of allocation of state funds for
programs under RCW 28A.155.010 through 28A.155.100. The definition of full
time equivalent student shall be determined by rules of the superintendent of public
instruction: PROVIDED, That the definition shall be included as part of the
superintendent's biennial budget request: PROVIDED, FURTHER, That any revision
of the present definition shall not take effect until approved by the house
appropriations committee and the senate ways and means committee: PROVIDED,
FURTHER, That the office of financial management shall make a monthly review of
the superintendent's reported full time equivalent students in the common
schools in conjunction with RCW 43.62.050.

(3)(((a)))
Certificated instructional staff shall include those persons employed by a
school district who are nonsupervisory employees within the meaning of RCW
41.59.020(8): PROVIDED, That principals and vice-principals shall be
included in the definition and in exceptional cases, people of unusual
competence but without certification may teach students so long as a
certificated person exercises general supervision: PROVIDED, FURTHER, That the
hiring of such classified people shall not occur during a labor dispute and
such classified people shall not be hired to replace certificated employees
during a labor dispute.

(((b) Certificated
administrative staff shall include all those persons who are chief executive
officers, chief administrative officers, confidential employees, supervisors,
principals, or assistant principals within the meaning of RCW 41.59.020(4).))

Sec. 7. RCW 28A.315.005 and 1999
c 315 s 1 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) Under the
constitutional framework and the laws of the state of Washington, the
governance structure for the state's public common school system is comprised
of the following bodies: The legislature, the governor, the superintendent of
public instruction, the state board of education, the educational service
district boards of directors, the county school administrative cooperatives,
and local school district boards of directors. The respective policy and
administrative roles of each body are determined by the state Constitution and
statutes.

(2) Local school
districts are political subdivisions of the state and the organization of such
districts, including the powers, duties, and boundaries thereof, may be altered
or abolished by laws of the state of Washington.

Sec. 8. RCW 28A.330.100 and 1995
c 335 s 503 and 1995 c 77 s 22 are each reenacted and amended to read as
follows:

Every board of
directors of a school district of the first class, in addition to the general
powers for directors enumerated in this title, shall have the power:

(1) ((To employ for
a term of not exceeding three years a superintendent of schools of the
district, and for cause to dismiss him or her; and to fix his or her duties and
compensation.

(2) To employ, and
for cause dismiss one or more assistant superintendents and to define their
duties and fix their compensation.

(3) To employ a
business manager, attorneys, architects, inspectors of construction,
superintendents of buildings and a superintendent of supplies, all of whom shall
serve at the board's pleasure, and to prescribe their duties and fix their
compensation.

(4) To employ, and
for cause dismiss, supervisors of instruction and to define their duties and
fix their compensation.

(5))) To prescribe a course of study and a program
of exercises which shall be consistent with the course of study prepared by the
state board of education for the use of the common schools of this state.

(((6))) (2)
To, in addition to the minimum requirements imposed by this title establish and
maintain such grades and departments, including night, high, kindergarten,
vocational training and, except as otherwise provided by law, industrial
schools, and schools and departments for the education and training of any
class or classes of youth with disabilities, as in the judgment of the board,
best shall promote the interests of education in the district.

(((7))) (3)
To determine the length of time over and above one hundred eighty days that
school shall be maintained: PROVIDED, That for purposes of apportionment no
district shall be credited with more than one hundred and eighty-three days'
attendance in any school year; and to fix the time for annual opening and
closing of schools and for the daily dismissal of pupils before the regular
time for closing schools.

(((8))) (4)
To maintain a shop and repair department, and to employ, and for cause dismiss,
a foreman and the necessary help for the maintenance and conduct thereof.

(((9))) (5)
To provide free textbooks and supplies for all children attending school.

(((10) To require of
the officers or employees of the district to give a bond for the honest
performance of their duties in such penal sum as may be fixed by the board with
good and sufficient surety, and to cause the premium for all bonds required of
all such officers or employees to be paid by the district: PROVIDED, That the
board may, by written policy, allow that such bonds may include a deductible
proviso not to exceed two percent of the officer's or employee's annual salary.

(11))) (6) To prohibit all secret fraternities
and sororities among the students in any of the schools of the said districts.

(((12))) (7)
To ((appoint)) recommend to the county school administrative
cooperative the appointment of a practicing physician, resident of the
school district, who shall be known as the school district medical inspector,
and whose duty it shall be to decide for the board of directors all questions
of sanitation and health affecting the safety and welfare of the public schools
of the district who shall serve at the ((board's)) cooperative's
pleasure: PROVIDED, That children shall not be required to submit to
vaccination against the will of their parents or guardian.

(8) To hire such
instructional, classified, and administrative employees as the district deems
appropriate if the district fully funds all costs associated with
administrative employees from nonstate sources.

Sec. 9. RCW 28A.400.010 and 1990
c 33 s 376 are each amended to read as follows:

((In)) For
all school districts under its jurisdiction, the ((board of
directors)) county school administrative cooperative shall elect ((a))
one superintendent who shall have such qualifications as the ((local
school board)) county school administrative cooperative alone shall
determine. The superintendent shall have supervision over the several
departments of the schools thereof and carry out such other powers and duties
as prescribed by law. Notwithstanding the provisions of RCW 28A.400.300(1),
the ((board)) county school administrative cooperative may
contract with such superintendent for a term not to exceed three years when
deemed in the best interest of the districts under the jurisdiction of the
county school administrative cooperative. The right to renew a contract of
employment with any school superintendent shall rest solely with the discretion
of the ((school board)) county school administrative cooperative
employing such school superintendent. Regarding such renewal of contracts of
school superintendents the provisions of RCW 28A.405.210, 28A.405.240, and
28A.645.010 shall be inapplicable.

Sec. 10. RCW 28A.400.030 and 1991
c 116 s 14 are each amended to read as follows:

In addition to such
other duties as a ((district school board)) county school
administrative cooperative shall prescribe, the ((school district))
superintendent or the superintendent's designee shall:

(1) Attend all meetings
of the board of directors of each school district under the jurisdiction of
the county school administrative cooperative and cause to have made a
record as to the proceedings thereof.

(2) Keep such records
and reports and in such form as the district board of directors require or as
otherwise required by law or rule or regulation of higher administrative
agencies and turn the same over to his or her successor.

(3) Keep accurate and
detailed accounts of all receipts and expenditures of school money. At each
annual school meeting the superintendent must present his or her record book of
board proceedings for public inspection, and shall make a statement of the
financial condition of the district and such record book must always be open
for public inspection.

(4) Give such notice of
all annual or special elections as otherwise required by law; also give notice
of the regular and special meetings of the board of directors.

(5) Sign all orders for
warrants ordered to be issued by the board of directors.

(6) Carry out all
orders of the board of directors made at any regular or special meeting.

Sec. 11. RCW 28A.400.100 and 1977
ex.s. c 272 s 1 are each amended to read as follows:

((School districts))
County school administrative cooperatives, in consultation with each school
district under the jurisdiction of the cooperative, may employ public
school principals and/or vice principals to supervise the operation and
management of the school to which they are assigned. Such persons shall hold
valid teacher and administrative certificates. In addition to such other
duties as shall be prescribed by law and by the job description adopted by the county
school administrative cooperative, in consultation with the school district
board of directors, each principal shall:

(1) Assume
administrative authority, responsibility and instructional leadership, under
the supervision of the ((school district)) superintendent, and in
accordance with the policies of the school district board of directors, for the
planning, management, supervision and evaluation of the educational program of
the attendance area for which he or she is responsible.

(2) Submit
recommendations to the ((school district)) superintendent regarding
appointment, assignment, promotion, transfer and dismissal of all personnel
assigned to the attendance area for which he or she is responsible.

(3) Submit
recommendations to the ((school district)) superintendent regarding the
fiscal needs to maintain and improve the instructional program of the
attendance area for which he or she is responsible.

(4) Assume
administrative authority and responsibility for the supervision, counseling and
discipline of pupils in the attendance area for which he or she is responsible.

Sec. 12. RCW 28A.400.200 and 1997
c 141 s 2 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) Every county
school administrative cooperative, in consultation with the school district
board of directors, shall fix, alter, allow, and order paid salaries and
compensation for all district employees in conformance with this section.

(2)(a) Salaries for
certificated instructional staff shall not be less than the salary provided in
the appropriations act in the statewide salary allocation schedule for an
employee with a baccalaureate degree and zero years of service; and

(b) Salaries for
certificated instructional staff with a masters degree shall not be less than
the salary provided in the appropriations act in the statewide salary
allocation schedule for an employee with a masters degree and zero years of
service;

(3)(a) The actual
average salary paid to basic education and special education certificated
instructional staff shall not exceed the district's average basic education and
special education program certificated instructional staff salary used for the
state basic education allocations for that school year as determined pursuant
to RCW 28A.150.410.

(b) Fringe benefit
contributions for basic education and special education certificated
instructional staff shall be included as salary under (a) of this subsection
only to the extent that the district's actual average benefit contribution
exceeds the amount of the insurance benefits allocation provided per
certificated instructional staff unit in the state operating appropriations act
in effect at the time the compensation is payable. For purposes of this
section, fringe benefits shall not include payment for unused leave for illness
or injury under RCW 28A.400.210; employer contributions for old age survivors
insurance, workers' compensation, unemployment compensation, and retirement
benefits under the Washington state retirement system; or employer
contributions for health benefits in excess of the insurance benefits
allocation provided per certificated instructional staff unit in the state
operating appropriations act in effect at the time the compensation is
payable. A school district may not use state funds to provide employer
contributions for such excess health benefits.

(c) Salary and benefits
for certificated instructional staff in programs other than basic education and
special education shall be consistent with the salary and benefits paid to
certificated instructional staff in the basic education and special education
programs.

(4) Salaries and
benefits for certificated instructional staff may exceed the limitations in
subsection (3) of this section only by separate contract for additional time,
additional responsibilities, or incentives. Supplemental contracts shall not
cause the state to incur any present or future funding obligation.
Supplemental contracts shall be subject to the collective bargaining provisions
of chapter 41.59 RCW and the provisions of RCW 28A.405.240, shall not exceed
one year, and if not renewed shall not constitute adverse change in accordance
with RCW 28A.405.300 through 28A.405.380. No district may enter into a
supplemental contract under this subsection for the provision of services which
are a part of the basic education program required by Article IX, section 3 of
the state Constitution.

(5) Employee benefit
plans offered by any district shall comply with RCW 28A.400.350 and 28A.400.275
and 28A.400.280.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
13. If any provision of this
act or its application to any person or circumstance is held invalid, the
remainder of the act or the application of the provision to other persons or
circumstances is not affected.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 14. This act takes effect
July 1, 2002.

---
END ---