BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF
WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1. RCW 9.46.010 and 1996 c
101 s 2 are each amended to read as follows:

The public policy of
the state of Washington on gambling is to keep the criminal element out of
gambling and to promote the social welfare of the people by limiting the nature
and scope of gambling activities and by strict regulation and control.

It is hereby declared
to be the policy of the legislature, recognizing the close relationship between
professional gambling and organized crime, to restrain all persons from seeking
profit from professional gambling activities in this state; to restrain all
persons from patronizing such professional gambling activities; to safeguard
the public against the evils induced by common gamblers and common gambling
houses engaged in professional gambling; and at the same time, both to preserve
the freedom of the press and to avoid restricting participation by individuals
in activities and social pastimes, which activities and social pastimes are
more for amusement rather than for profit, do not maliciously affect the
public, and do not breach the peace.

The legislature further
declares that the raising of funds for the promotion of bona fide charitable or
nonprofit organizations is in the public interest as is participation in such
activities and social pastimes as are hereinafter in this chapter authorized.

The legislature further
declares that the conducting of bingo, raffles, and amusement games and the
operation of punch boards, pull-tabs, video pull-tabs, card games,
and other social pastimes, when conducted pursuant to the provisions of this
chapter and any rules ((and regulations)) adopted pursuant thereto, are
hereby authorized, as are only such lotteries for which no valuable
consideration has been paid or agreed to be paid as hereinafter in this chapter
provided.

The legislature further
declares that fishing derbies shall not constitute any form of gambling and
shall not be considered as a lottery, a raffle, or an amusement game and shall
not be subject to the provisions of this chapter or any rules ((and
regulations)) adopted hereunder.

The legislature further
declares that raffles authorized by the fish and wildlife commission involving
hunting big game animals or wild turkeys shall not be subject to the provisions
of this chapter or any rules ((and regulations)) adopted hereunder, with
the exception of this section and RCW 9.46.400.

All
factors incident to the activities authorized in this chapter shall be closely
controlled, and the provisions of this chapter shall be liberally construed to
achieve such end.

Sec. 2. RCW 9.46.0273 and 1987 c
4 s 19 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) "Punch
boards" and "pull-tabs," as used in this chapter, shall be given
their usual and ordinary meaning as of July 16, 1973, except that such
definition may be revised by the commission pursuant to rules ((and
regulations promulgated)) adopted pursuant to this chapter.

(2) "Video pull‑tabs"
means a video display of a single pull‑tab ticket, the face of which is
initially covered or otherwise hidden from view to conceal a number, symbol, or
set of symbols, a few of which numbers or symbols out of every set of pull‑tabs
have been designated in advance and at random as prize winners, when, for the
opportunity to view the numbers or symbols thereon and possibly obtain a prize,
a person pays some consideration to an operator.

Each video pull‑tab
game consists of a finite number of video pull‑tabs, a certain number of
which, if drawn, entitle a player to prize awards at various levels. Video
pull‑tabs may only be accessed through a linked system of player
terminals that only allow players to compete against other players. Player
terminals do not allow for individual play against any terminal. The number of
player terminals for use by each licensee must be as described in section 12 of
this act. A video pull‑tab system includes video pull‑tab
terminals that are played by use of computer hardware and software to
manufacture, store, distribute, sell, and display video pull‑tabs to
players. This section does not authorize any form of slot machine.

Sec. 3. RCW 9.46.0311 and 1987 c
4 s 26 are each amended to read as follows:

The legislature hereby
authorizes bona fide charitable or nonprofit organizations to conduct bingo
games, raffles, amusement games, ((and)) fund‑raising events,
and to ((utilize)) use punch boards ((and)),
pull-tabs, video pull-tabs, and video pull-tab systems, and to allow
their premises and facilities to be used by only members, their guests, and
members of a chapter or unit organized under the same state, regional, or
national charter or constitution, to play social card games authorized by the
commission, when licensed, conducted, or operated pursuant to the
provisions of this chapter and rules ((and regulations)) adopted
pursuant thereto.

Sec. 4. RCW 9.46.0325 and 1987 c
4 s 29 are each amended to read as follows:

The legislature hereby
authorizes any person, association, or organization operating an
established business primarily engaged in the selling of food or drink for consumption
on the premises to conduct social card games and to ((utilize)) use
punch boards ((and)), pull-tabs, video pull-tabs, and video
pull-tab systems as a commercial stimulant to such business when licensed
and ((utilized)) used or operated pursuant to the provisions of
this chapter and rules ((and regulations)) adopted pursuant thereto.

Sec. 5. RCW 9.46.070 and 1999 c
143 s 6 are each amended to read as follows:

The commission shall
have the following powers and duties:

(1) To authorize and
issue licenses for a period not to exceed one year to bona fide charitable or
nonprofit organizations approved by the commission meeting the requirements of
this chapter and any rules ((and regulations)) adopted pursuant thereto
permitting said organizations to conduct bingo games, raffles, amusement games,
((and)) social card games, and to ((utilize)) use
punch boards ((and)), pull-tabs, video pull-tabs, and video
pull-tab systems in accordance with the provisions of this chapter and any
rules ((and regulations)) adopted pursuant thereto and to revoke or
suspend said licenses for violation of any provisions of this chapter or any
rules ((and regulations)) adopted pursuant thereto: PROVIDED, That the
commission shall not deny a license to an otherwise qualified applicant in an
effort to limit the number of licenses to be issued: PROVIDED FURTHER, That
the commission or director shall not issue, deny, suspend, or revoke any
license because of considerations of race, sex, creed, color, or national
origin: AND PROVIDED FURTHER, That the commission may authorize the director
to temporarily issue or suspend licenses subject to final action by the
commission;

(2) To authorize and
issue licenses for a period not to exceed one year to any person, association,
or organization operating a business primarily engaged in the selling of items
of food or drink for consumption on the premises, approved by the commission
meeting the requirements of this chapter and any rules ((and regulations))
adopted pursuant thereto permitting said person, association, or organization
to ((utilize)) use punch boards ((and)), pull-tabs,
video pull-tabs, and video pull-tab systems and to conduct social card
games as a commercial stimulant in accordance with the provisions of this
chapter and any rules ((and regulations)) adopted pursuant thereto and
to revoke or suspend said licenses for violation of any provisions of this
chapter and any rules ((and regulations)) adopted pursuant thereto:
PROVIDED, That the commission shall not deny a license to an otherwise
qualified applicant in an effort to limit the number of licenses to be issued:
PROVIDED FURTHER, That the commission may authorize the director to temporarily
issue or suspend licenses subject to final action by the commission;

(3) To authorize and
issue licenses for a period not to exceed one year to any person, association,
or organization approved by the commission meeting the requirements of this
chapter and meeting the requirements of any rules ((and regulations))
adopted by the commission pursuant to this chapter as now or hereafter amended,
permitting said person, association, or organization to conduct or operate
amusement games in such manner and at such locations as the commission may
determine;

(4) To authorize,
require, and issue, for a period not to exceed one year, such licenses as the
commission may by rule provide, to any person, association, or organization to
engage in the selling, distributing, or otherwise supplying or in the manufacturing
of devices for use within this state for those activities authorized by this
chapter;

(5) To establish a
schedule of annual license fees for carrying on specific gambling activities
upon the premises, and for such other activities as may be licensed by the
commission, which fees shall provide to the commission not less than an amount
of money adequate to cover all costs incurred by the commission relative to
licensing under this chapter and the enforcement by the commission of the
provisions of this chapter and rules ((and regulations)) adopted
pursuant thereto: PROVIDED, That all licensing fees shall be submitted with an
application therefor and such portion of said fee as the commission may
determine, based upon its cost of processing and investigation, shall be
retained by the commission upon the withdrawal or denial of any such license
application as its reasonable expense for processing the application and
investigation into the granting thereof: PROVIDED FURTHER, That if in a
particular case the basic license fee established by the commission for a
particular class of license is less than the commission's actual expenses to
investigate that particular application, the commission may at any time charge
to that applicant such additional fees as are necessary to pay the commission
for those costs. The commission may decline to proceed with its investigation
and no license shall be issued until the commission has been fully paid
therefor by the applicant: AND PROVIDED FURTHER, That the commission may
establish fees for the furnishing by it to licensees of identification stamps
to be affixed to such devices and equipment as required by the commission and
for such other special services or programs required or offered by the
commission, the amount of each of these fees to be not less than is adequate to
offset the cost to the commission of the stamps and of administering their
dispersal to licensees or the cost of administering such other special
services, requirements or programs;

(6) To prescribe the
manner and method of payment of taxes, fees and penalties to be paid to or
collected by the commission;

(7) To require that
applications for all licenses contain such information as may be required by
the commission: PROVIDED, That all persons (a) having a managerial or
ownership interest in any gambling activity, or the building in which any
gambling activity occurs, or the equipment to be used for any gambling
activity, or (b) participating as an employee in the operation of any gambling
activity, shall be listed on the application for the license and the applicant
shall certify on the application, under oath, that the persons named on the
application are all of the persons known to have an interest in any gambling
activity, building, or equipment by the person making such application:
PROVIDED FURTHER, That the commission may require fingerprinting and background
checks on any persons seeking licenses under this chapter or of any person
holding an interest in any gambling activity, building, or equipment to be used
therefor, or of any person participating as an employee in the operation of any
gambling activity;

(8) To require that any
license holder maintain records as directed by the commission and submit such
reports as the commission may deem necessary;

(9) To require that all
income from bingo games, raffles, and amusement games be recorded and reported
as established by rule ((or regulation)) of the commission to the extent
deemed necessary by considering the scope and character of the gambling activity
in such a manner that will disclose gross income from any gambling activity,
amounts received from each player, the nature and value of prizes, and the fact
of distributions of such prizes to the winners thereof;

(10) To regulate and
establish maximum limitations on income derived from bingo. In establishing
limitations pursuant to this subsection the commission shall take into account
(i) the nature, character, and scope of the activities of the licensee; (ii)
the source of all other income of the licensee; and (iii) the percentage or
extent to which income derived from bingo is used for charitable, as
distinguished from nonprofit, purposes. However, the commission's powers and
duties granted by this subsection are discretionary and not mandatory;

(11) To regulate and
establish the type and scope of and manner of conducting the gambling
activities authorized by this chapter, including but not limited to, the extent
of wager, money, or other thing of value which may be wagered or contributed or
won by a player in any such activities;

(12) To regulate the
collection of and the accounting for the fee which may be imposed by an
organization, corporation, or person licensed to conduct a social card game on
a person desiring to become a player in a social card game in accordance with
RCW 9.46.0282;

(13) To cooperate with
and secure the cooperation of county, city, and other local or state agencies
in investigating any matter within the scope of its duties and
responsibilities;

(14) In accordance with
RCW 9.46.080, to adopt such rules ((and regulations)) as are deemed
necessary to carry out the purposes and provisions of this chapter. All rules
((and regulations)) shall be adopted pursuant to the administrative
procedure act, chapter 34.05 RCW;

(15) To set forth for
the perusal of counties, city-counties, cities and towns, model ordinances by
which any legislative authority thereof may enter into the taxing of any
gambling activity authorized by this chapter;

(16) To establish and
regulate a maximum limit on salaries or wages which may be paid to persons
employed in connection with activities conducted by bona fide charitable or
nonprofit organizations and authorized by this chapter, where payment of such
persons is allowed, and to regulate and establish maximum limits for other
expenses in connection with such authorized activities, including but not
limited to rent or lease payments. However, the commissioner's powers and
duties granted by this subsection are discretionary and not mandatory.

In establishing these
maximum limits the commission shall take into account the amount of income
received, or expected to be received, from the class of activities to which the
limits will apply and the amount of money the games could generate for authorized
charitable or nonprofit purposes absent such expenses. The commission may also
take into account, in its discretion, other factors, including but not limited
to, the local prevailing wage scale and whether charitable purposes are
benefited by the activities;

(17) To authorize,
require, and issue for a period not to exceed one year such licenses or
permits, for which the commission may by rule provide, to any person to work
for any operator of any gambling activity authorized by this chapter in
connection with that activity, or any manufacturer, supplier, or distributor of
devices for those activities in connection with such business. The commission
shall not require that persons working solely as volunteers in an authorized
activity conducted by a bona fide charitable or bona fide nonprofit
organization, who receive no compensation of any kind for any purpose from that
organization, and who have no managerial or supervisory responsibility in
connection with that activity, be licensed to do such work. The commission may
require that licensees employing such unlicensed volunteers submit to the
commission periodically a list of the names, addresses, and dates of birth of
the volunteers. If any volunteer is not approved by the commission, the
commission may require that the licensee not allow that person to work in
connection with the licensed activity;

(18) To publish and
make available at the office of the commission or elsewhere to anyone
requesting it a list of the commission licensees, including the name, address,
type of license, and license number of each licensee;

(19) To establish
guidelines for determining what constitutes active membership in bona fide
nonprofit or charitable organizations for the purposes of this chapter; and

(20) To perform all
other matters and things necessary to carry out the purposes and provisions of
this chapter.

Sec. 6. RCW 9.46.110 and 1999 c
221 s 1 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) The legislative
authority of any county, city-county, city, or town, by local law and
ordinance, and in accordance with the provisions of this chapter and rules
adopted under this chapter, may provide for the taxing of any gambling activity
authorized by this chapter within its jurisdiction, the tax receipts to go to
the county, city-county, city, or town so taxing the activity. Any such tax
imposed by a county alone shall not apply to any gambling activity within a
city or town located in the county but the tax rate established by a county, if
any, shall constitute the tax rate throughout the unincorporated areas of such
county.

(2) The operation of
punch boards ((and)), pull-tabs, video pull-tabs, and video
pull-tab systems are subject to the following conditions:

(a) Chances may only be
sold to adults;

(b) The price of a
single chance may not exceed one dollar;

(c) No punch board ((or)),
pull-tab ((license)), or video pull-tab system licensee may award
as a prize upon a winning number or symbol being drawn the opportunity of
taking a chance upon any other punch board ((or)), pull-tab,
or video pull-tab;

(d) All prizes
available to be won must be described on an information flare or video flare
display. All merchandise prizes must be on display within the immediate
area of the premises in which any such punch board ((or)),
pull-tab, or video pull-tab terminal is located. Upon a winning number
or symbol being ((drawn)) selected, a merchandise prize must be
immediately removed from the display and awarded to the winner. All references
to cash or merchandise prizes, with a value over twenty dollars, must be
removed immediately from the information flare or video flare display
when won, or such omission shall be deemed a fraud for the purposes of this
chapter; and

(e) When any person
wins money or merchandise from any punch board ((or)), pull-tab,
or video pull-tab over an amount determined by the commission, every
licensee shall keep a public record of the award for at least ((ninety))
sixty days containing such information as the commission shall deem
necessary.

(3)(a) Taxation of
bingo and raffles shall never be in an amount greater than five percent of the
gross receipts from a bingo game or raffle less the amount awarded as cash or
merchandise prizes.

(b) Taxation of
amusement games shall only be in an amount sufficient to pay the actual costs
of enforcement of the provisions of this chapter by the county, city or town
law enforcement agency and in no event shall such taxation exceed two percent
of the gross receipts from the amusement game less the amount awarded as
prizes.

(c) No tax shall be
imposed under the authority of this chapter on bingo or amusement games when
such activities or any combination thereof are conducted by any bona fide
charitable or nonprofit organization as defined in this chapter, which
organization has no paid operating or management personnel and has gross
receipts from bingo or amusement games, or a combination thereof, not exceeding
five thousand dollars per year, less the amount awarded as cash or merchandise
prizes.

(d) No tax shall be
imposed on the first ten thousand dollars of gross receipts less the amount
awarded as cash or merchandise prizes from raffles conducted by any bona fide
charitable or nonprofit organization as defined in this chapter.

(e) Taxation of punch
boards and pull-tabs ((for bona fide charitable or nonprofit organizations
is)) by a county, city, or town must be based on ((gross)) the
net gambling receipts from the operation of the games ((less the amount
awarded as cash or merchandise prizes)), and shall not exceed a rate of ten
percent. ((At the option of the county, city-county, city, or town, the
taxation of punch boards and pull-tabs for commercial stimulant operators may
be based on gross receipts from the operation of the games, and may not exceed
a rate of five percent, or may be based on gross receipts from the operation of
the games less the amount awarded as cash or merchandise prizes, and may not
exceed a rate of ten percent.))

(f) Taxation of social
card games may not exceed twenty percent of the gross revenue from such games.

(4) Taxes imposed under
this chapter become a lien upon personal and real property of the licensee
used in the gambling activity in the same manner as provided for under RCW
84.60.010. The lien shall attach on the date the tax becomes due and shall
relate back and have priority against real and personal property to the same
extent as ad valorem taxes.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
7. A new section is added
to chapter 82.04 RCW to read as follows:

Upon every person
engaging within the state in the business of selling video pull-tabs; as to
such persons, the amount of tax with respect to such business shall be equal to
the gross proceeds of sales of video pull-tabs, multiplied by five percent.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
8. A new section is added
to chapter 82.14 RCW to read as follows:

The legislative
authority of any county, city‑county, city, or town, by local law or
ordinance, and in accordance with this chapter and rules adopted under it, may
provide for the collection of taxes generated from video pull‑tab sales.
The tax may be set at up to five percent of the net gambling receipts from the
sales of video pull‑tabs.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
9. A new section is added
to chapter 9.46 RCW to read as follows:

The problem gaming
prevention account is created in the custody of the state treasurer. All
receipts from the tax collected under section 7 of this act must be deposited
into the account. Expenditures in this account may be used only for problem
gaming prevention, youth education, public awareness, training, help-line
services, and treatment under the division of alcohol and substance abuse in
the department of social and health services.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
10. A new section is added
to chapter 9.46 RCW to read as follows:

The department of
revenue must adopt rules to carry out sections 7 and 8 of this act.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
11. A new section is added
to chapter 9.46 RCW to read as follows:

Placement of video pull‑tab
terminals and video pull-tab systems is allowed only in areas and on premises
classified by the Washington state liquor control board as minor‑prohibited
areas and facilities and premises licensed by the commission.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
12. A new section is added
to chapter 9.46 RCW to read as follows:

The maximum number of
video pull‑tab terminals per licensed premises is twenty‑five. A
minimum of five video pull‑tab terminals is required.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
13. A new section is added
to chapter 9.46 RCW to read as follows:

License fees for video
pull‑tab system licensees must be established by the commission on a
sliding scale basis. The fee schedule established by the commission must be
based on the total number of video pull‑tab terminals per licensed
location and the amount net gambling receipts for each licensed premise.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
14. A new section is added
to chapter 9.46 RCW to read as follows:

"Net gambling
receipts" means all gross gambling receipts from any gambling activity,
less the monetary value or, in the case of merchandise, the actual cost, of any
prizes that were awarded.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
15. A new section is added
to chapter 9.46 RCW to read as follows:

Unless play is
conducted on premises which otherwise require surveillance for operation, no
surveillance is required by video pull-tab system licensees.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
16. A new section is added
to chapter 9.46 RCW to read as follows:

Video pull‑tab
systems must be approved by the commission subject to the following conditions:

(1) The system must:

(a) Produce accurate
facsimiles of one or more standard series of pull‑tabs;

(b) Randomly select a
pull‑tab before each round of play;

(c) Contain a backup
system for recording and display of at least five previous plays;

(d) Contain security
protocols that prevent unauthorized access;

(e) Provide a means of
testing of computer software;

(f) Meet any additional
technical standards required by the commission; and

(g) Be tested by a
licensed game testing laboratory for compliance with these requirements.

(2) The costs of
initial laboratory testing and any additional testing required by the
commission will be paid for by the manufacturer.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 17. This act is necessary for
the immediate preservation of the public peace, health, or safety, or support
of the state government and its existing public institutions, and takes effect
immediately.

---
END ---