BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF
WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1. RCW 74.39A.005 and 2000
c 121 s 9 are each amended to read as follows:

The legislature finds
that the aging of the population and advanced medical technology have resulted
in a growing number of persons who require assistance. The primary resource
for long-term care continues to be family and friends. However, these
traditional caregivers are increasingly employed outside the home. There is a
growing demand for improvement and expansion of home and community-based
long-term care services to support and complement the services provided by
these informal caregivers.

The legislature further
finds that the public interest would best be served by a broad array of
long-term care services that support persons who need such services at home or
in the community whenever practicable and that promote individual autonomy,
dignity, and choice.

The legislature finds
that as other long-term care options become more available, the relative need
for nursing home beds is likely to decline. The legislature recognizes,
however, that nursing home care will continue to be a critical part of the
state's long-term care options, and that such services should promote
individual dignity, autonomy, and a homelike environment.

The legislature finds
that many recipients of in-home services are vulnerable and their health and
well-being are dependent on their caregivers. The quality, skills, and
knowledge of their caregivers are often the key to good care. The legislature
finds that the need for well-trained caregivers is growing as the state's
population ages and clients' needs increase. The legislature intends that
current training standards be enhanced.

The demands on the
state's long-term care system are projected to increase dramatically over the
next several years. Unless the legislature takes immediate steps to address
the increasing demand for services and the financing of such services, it will
be impossible to meet the long-term care needs of older persons and adults with
disabilities in the future. It is extremely important that all Washingtonians
in need of long-term care services have access to a quality service system that
provides users of the system and their families with viable options for a
variety of needed services that provides the most dignity and independence
possible. Solutions for addressing this issue must first prioritize the needs
of consumers of long-term care, their families, and their caregivers.

All Washingtonians
receiving long‑term care should receive quality care regardless of care
setting, and the state's policy should not reflect a bias toward any particular
care setting. Rather, consumer choice should shape the options available to
seniors and adults with disabilities because support of an array of long‑term
care options in the continuum of care is the best way to meet consumer
expectations and provide services most cost effectively.

Adults needing long‑term
care services should receive the same quality of care regardless of their age,
ability to pay, or source of payment. For clients whose services are paid for
by the state, reimbursement to providers of service must reflect the cost of
providing quality care to those in need of service. Regardless of the care
setting, providers of long‑term care services should be reimbursed at a
rate proportional to the level of client care needs, and caregivers in all long‑term
care settings should be adequately compensated for their work.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
2. (1) The long-term care
steering committee is created to study options for providing a stable and
consistent funding stream to meet the growing needs of longBterm care consumers and
make recommendations to the legislature on the study findings. The study shall
examine all options for continuing to fund a long-term care system that will
meet consumer need for choice, access, quality, dignity, and independence,
reimburse service providers for the actual and necessary costs of providing
care, and provide adequate compensation to caregivers in the system. Among the
topics to be studied are increased incentives for consumers to purchase
long-term care insurance, ways to increase federal funding for long-term care
services, and ways to increase state revenues to adequately fund long-term care
services.

(2) The steering
committee shall be made up of the following thirteen members:

(a) Four legislators,
one appointed by each caucus in the legislature;

(b) One person
appointed by the governor to represent the governor's office;

(c) Four individuals
from organizations who represent the interests of consumers of long-term care
services, to be appointed by the governor;

(d) Three persons from
organizations that represent the interests of providers of long-term care
services, to be appointed by the governor; and

(e) One person from an
organization representing the interests of caregivers of long-term care
services, to be appointed by the governor.

(3) The office of
financial management shall contract under chapter 39.29 RCW to provide staff to
conduct the study under the direction of the steering committee.

(4) The steering
committee shall submit a report on the study findings and its recommendations
to the chairs of the house health care committee, house appropriations
committee, senate health and long-term care committee, and senate ways and
means committee by December 1, 2002.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 3. The sum of seventy-five
thousand dollars, or as much thereof as may be necessary, is appropriated for
the fiscal year ending June 30, 2003, from the general fund to the office of
financial management for the purposes of section 2 of this act.

---
END ---