BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF
WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec.
1. A new section is added
to chapter 49.17 RCW to read as follows:

Rules dealing with
musculoskeletal disorders, adopted on May 26, 2000, by the director, and
codified as WAC 296-62-05101 through 296-62-05176, shall have no force or
effect. The director shall not adopt any new or amended rules dealing with
musculoskeletal disorders that are substantially the same as these rules.

Sec. 2. RCW 49.17.040 and 1973 c
80 s 4 are each amended to read as follows:

Except as provided
in section 1 of this act, the director shall make, adopt, modify, and
repeal rules ((and regulations)) governing safety and health standards
for conditions of employment as authorized by this chapter after a public
hearing in conformance with the administrative procedure act and the provisions
of this chapter. At least thirty days prior to such public hearing, the
director shall cause public notice of such hearing to be made in newspapers of
general circulation in this state, of the date, time, and place of such public
hearing, along with a general description of the subject matter of the proposed
rules and information as to where copies of any rules ((and regulations))
proposed for adoption may be obtained and with a solicitation for
recommendations in writing or suggestions for inclusion or changes in such
rules to be submitted not later than five days prior to such public hearing.
Any preexisting rules adopted by the department of labor and industries
relating to health and safety standards in work places subject to the
jurisdiction of the department shall remain effective insofar as such rules are
not inconsistent with the provisions of this chapter.

Sec. 3. RCW 49.17.050 and 1998 c
224 s 1 are each amended to read as follows:

Except as provided
in RCW 49.17.040, in the adoption of rules ((and regulations)) under
the authority of this chapter, the director shall:

(1) Provide for the
preparation, adoption, amendment, or repeal of rules ((and regulations))
of safety and health standards governing the conditions of employment of
general and special application in all work places;

(2) Provide for the
adoption of occupational health and safety standards which are at least as
effective as those adopted or recognized by the United States secretary of
labor under the authority of the Occupational Safety and Health Act of 1970
(Public Law 91-596; 84 Stat. 1590);

(3) Provide a method of
encouraging employers and employees in their efforts to reduce the number of
safety and health hazards at their work places and to stimulate employers and
employees to institute new and to perfect existing programs for providing safe
and healthful working conditions;

(4) Provide for the
promulgation of health and safety standards and the control of conditions in
all work places concerning gases, vapors, dust, or other airborne particles,
toxic materials, or harmful physical agents which shall set a standard which
most adequately assures, to the extent feasible, on the basis of the best
available evidence, that no employee will suffer material impairment of health
or functional capacity even if such employee has regular exposure to the hazard
dealt with by such standard for the period of his working life; any such
standards shall require where appropriate the use of protective devices or
equipment and for monitoring or measuring any such gases, vapors, dust, or
other airborne particles, toxic materials, or harmful physical agents;

(5) Provide for
appropriate reporting procedures by employers with respect to such information
relating to conditions of employment which will assist in achieving the
objectives of this chapter;

(6) Provide for the
frequency, method, and manner of the making of inspections of work places
without advance notice; and,

(7) Provide for the
publication and dissemination to employers, employees, and labor organizations
and the posting where appropriate by employers of informational, education, or
training materials calculated to aid and assist in achieving the objectives of
this chapter;

(8) Provide for the
establishment of new and the perfection and expansion of existing programs for
occupational safety and health education for employers and employees, and, in
addition institute methods and procedures for the establishment of a program
for voluntary compliance solely through the use of advice and consultation with
employers and employees with recommendations including recommendations of
methods to abate violations relating to the requirements of this chapter and
all applicable safety and health standards and rules ((and regulations
promulgated)) adopted pursuant to the authority of this chapter;

(9) Provide for the
adoption of safety and health standards requiring the use of safeguards in
trenches and excavations and around openings of hoistways, hatchways,
elevators, stairways, and similar openings;

(10) Provide for the
promulgation of health and safety standards requiring the use of safeguards for
all vats, pans, trimmers, cut off, gang edger, and other saws, planers,
presses, formers, cogs, gearing, belting, shafting, coupling, set screws, live
rollers, conveyors, mangles in laundries, and machinery of similar description,
which can be effectively guarded with due regard to the ordinary use of such
machinery and appliances and the danger to employees therefrom, and with which
the employees of any such work place may come in contact while in the
performance of their duties and prescribe methods, practices, or processes to
be followed by employers which will enhance the health and safety of employees
in the performance of their duties when in proximity to machinery or appliances
mentioned in this subsection;

(11) Certify that no
later than twenty business days prior to the effective date of any significant
legislative rule, as defined by RCW 34.05.328, a meeting of impacted parties is
convened to: (a) Identify ambiguities and problem areas in the rule; (b)
coordinate education and public relations efforts by all parties; (c) provide
comments regarding internal department training and enforcement plans; and (d)
provide comments regarding appropriate evaluation mechanisms to determine the
effectiveness of the new rule. The meeting shall include a balanced
representation of both business and labor from impacted industries, department
personnel responsible for the above subject areas, and other agencies or key
stakeholder groups as determined by the department. An existing advisory
committee may be utilized if appropriate.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 4. This act is necessary for
the immediate preservation of the public peace, health, or safety, or support
of the state government and its existing public institutions, and takes effect
immediately.

---
END ---