BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF
WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec.
1. A new section is added
to chapter 83.100 RCW to read as follows:

(1) Notwithstanding any
other provision of this chapter, no tax is due under this chapter, and no
return need be filed under this chapter, if no federal tax is due under section
2001 of the United States Internal Revenue Code of 1986, as amended or
renumbered as of January 1, 2002.

(2) If a federal tax is
due under section 2001 of the United States Internal Revenue Code of 1986, as
amended or renumbered as of January 1, 2002, the tax imposed under this chapter
shall be calculated based on the United States Internal Revenue Code of 1986,
as amended or renumbered as of January 1, 2001.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
2. This act applies to
decedents dying on or after January 1, 2002.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 3. This act is necessary for
the immediate preservation of the public peace, health, or safety, or support
of the state government and its existing public institutions, and takes effect
immediately.

---
END ---