BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF
WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec.
1. A new section is added
to chapter 36.70A RCW to read as follows:

(1)(a) A rural county,
after conferring with its cities, may develop alternative methods of achieving
the planning goals established by RCW 36.70A.020.

(b) The authority
provided by this subsection may not be used to modify:

(i) Requirements for
the designation and protection of critical areas or for the designation of
natural resource lands under RCW 36.70A.060(2), 36.70A.170, and 36.70A.172; or

(ii) The requirement to
establish a process for the siting of essential public facilities pursuant to
RCW 36.70A.200.

(c) Before adopting any
alternative methods of achieving the planning goals established by RCW
36.70A.020, a rural county shall provide an opportunity for public review and
comment. An ordinance or resolution proposing or adopting alternative methods
must be submitted to the department in the same manner as provided in RCW
36.70A.106 for submittal of proposed and adopted comprehensive plans and
development regulations.

(2) For purposes of
this section, "rural county" means a county with a population density
of less than one hundred persons per square mile as determined by the office of
financial management and published each year by the department for the period
July 1st to June 30th.

Sec. 2. RCW 36.70A.320 and 1997
c 429 s 20 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) Except as provided
in subsection (5) of this section, comprehensive plans and development regulations,
and amendments thereto, adopted under this chapter are presumed valid upon
adoption.

(2) Except as otherwise
provided in subsection (4) of this section, the burden is on the petitioner to
demonstrate that any action taken by a state agency, county, or city under this
chapter is not in compliance with the requirements of this chapter.

(3) In any petition
under this chapter, the board, after full consideration of the petition, shall
determine whether there is compliance with the requirements of this chapter.
In making its determination, the board shall consider the criteria adopted by
the department under RCW 36.70A.190(4). The board shall find compliance unless
it determines that the action by the state agency, county, or city is clearly
erroneous in view of the entire record before the board and in light of the
goals and requirements of this chapter. In any petition concerning whether
or not a rural county's methods of achieving planning goals are in compliance
with this chapter, the board shall give great weight to decisions made by the
rural county with regard to developing alternative methods of achieving
planning goals under section 1 of this act, and the board shall find that such
alternative methods are in compliance with this chapter unless it finds by
clear, cogent, and convincing evidence that the alternative methods will not
achieve the planning goals established by RCW 36.70A.020.

(4) A county or city
subject to a determination of invalidity made under RCW 36.70A.300 or
36.70A.302 has the burden of demonstrating that the ordinance or resolution it
has enacted in response to the determination of invalidity will no longer
substantially interfere with the fulfillment of the goals of this chapter under
the standard in RCW 36.70A.302(1).

(5) The
shoreline element of a comprehensive plan and the applicable development
regulations adopted by a county or city shall take effect as provided in
chapter 90.58 RCW.

---
END ---