BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF
WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec.
1. The legislature finds
that many businesses in the state are frustrated by the complexity of the
regulatory system. The Washington Administrative Code containing agency rules
now fills twelve volumes, and appears to be growing each year. While the vast
majority of businesses make a good faith attempt to comply with applicable laws
and rules, many find it extremely difficult to keep up with agencies' issuance
of new rules and requirements. Therefore, state agencies are directed to make
a good faith attempt to notify businesses affected by rule changes that may
subject noncomplying businesses to penalties.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
2. A new section is added
to chapter 34.05 RCW to read as follows:

Within two
hundred days of the effective date of a rule that imposes additional
requirements on businesses the violation of which subjects the business to a
penalty, assessment, or administrative sanction, an agency shall make a good
faith effort to notify businesses affected by the rule of the requirements of
the rule and how to obtain technical assistance to comply. For purposes of
this section, "good faith" means: (1) The agency at least notifies
businesses in the standard industrial classifications or their successor
identified in the rule-making file as businesses affected by the rule that are
registered with the department of revenue; or (2) for rules imposing additional
requirements only on persons or firms licensed, registered, or operating under
a permit, the agency notifies those persons or firms holding the license,
registration, or permit. The notification shall announce the rule change,
briefly summarize the rule change, and include a contact for more information.
Notification may be by individual notice, agency bulletins or newsletters, or
any other means that will reasonably inform affected businesses. Failure to
notify a specific business under this section does not invalidate a rule or
waive the requirement to comply with the rule.

---
END ---