BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF
WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1. RCW 82.04.250 and 1998 c
343 s 5 and 1998 c 312 s 4 are each reenacted and amended to read as follows:

(1) Upon every person
except persons taxable under RCW 82.04.260(5), 82.04.272, or subsection (2) or
(3) of this section engaging within this state in the business of making
sales at retail, as to such persons, the amount of tax with respect to such
business shall be equal to the gross proceeds of sales of the business,
multiplied by the rate of 0.471 percent.

(2) Upon every person
engaging within this state in the business of making sales at retail that are
exempt from the tax imposed under chapter 82.08 RCW by reason of RCW
82.08.0261, 82.08.0262, or 82.08.0263 except as provided in subsection (3)
of this section, as to such persons, the amount of tax with respect to such
business shall be equal to the gross proceeds of sales of the business,
multiplied by the rate of 0.484 percent.

(3) Upon every
person engaging within this state in the business of making sales at retail
that are exempt from the tax imposed under chapter 82.08 RCW by reason of RCW
82.08.0261, 82.08.0262, or 82.08.0263, that are classified by the federal
aviation administration as FAR part 145 certificated repair stations with an
airframe class 4 rating and limited capabilities in instruments, radio
equipment, and specialized services, as to such persons, the amount of tax with
respect to such business shall be equal to the gross proceeds of sales of the
business, multiplied by the rate of .275 percent.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
2. A new section is added
to chapter 82.32 RCW to read as follows:

(1) A recipient
reporting under RCW 82.04.250(3) during a calendar year must file a report to
the department of revenue as required by this section.

(2) The following
information must be provided to the department:

(a) Name and address of
recipient of business incentive;

(b) Business
registration number;

(c) Identification of
project/location of project;

(d) Signature and phone
number of person filling out form;

(e) Date business
incentive was provided;

(f) Dollar value of
business incentive;

(g) Job
creation/retention goals for business receiving the incentive (please specify);

(h) Average hourly wage
goals for business receiving the incentive (per hour);

(i) Actual jobs
created/retained since business received the incentive (please specify);

(j) Actual average
hourly wage paid to employees hired since receiving the incentive;

(k) Goals of business
incentive received, as a result of the business incentive: (Please indicate
number of employees by category of job, e.g. full-time, part-time, or
contingent/temporary job, number of employees per wage band, and indicate if
employee benefits are provided);

(l) Actual performance
since project placed in service, as a result of the business incentive: (Please
indicate number of employees by category of job, e.g. full-time, part-time, or
contingent/temporary job, number of employees per wage band, and indicate if
employee benefits are provided);

(m) Last date actual
wage and job creation/retention levels documented;

(n) Have all wage and
job goals been achieved?

[ ] Yes B do not submit future forms
for this project.

[ ] No B please submit another form
next year;

(o) Did you take the
machinery and equipment exemption in the last year, and if the answer is
"yes" please estimate the amount of tax exempted; and

(p) Date this
disclosure form completed.

(3) A recipient who
fails to submit a complete report under this section is ineligible on a
prospective basis for the rate provided in RCW 82.04.250(3). The department of
revenue shall notify the recipient in writing by mail that he or she is no
longer eligible for the rate. The recipient is ineligible on the effective
date of the postmark of the notice letter from the department of revenue. If
the recipient satisfactorily completes the form after ineligibility, the
department of revenue shall send a letter to the recipient indicating that the
basis for the ineligibility has been corrected. The letter from the department
of revenue is proof that eligibility on this basis has been restored, and is
effective prospectively on the date the letter is postmarked.

(4) The department
shall establish due dates for the report required by this section.

(5) The department
shall report information on the effectiveness of RCW 82.04.250(3) to the
legislature on an annual basis.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
3. This act expires June 30,
2005.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 4. This act takes effect
August 1, 2002.

---
END ---