BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF
WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec.
1. LEGISLATIVE FINDINGS AND
INTENT.
(1) The legislature finds that:

(a) Businesses in
Washington are concerned about the potential multiple taxation that arises due
to the various city gross receipts taxes and the lack of uniformity among city
jurisdictions;

(b) The current system
of city gross receipts taxes has a negative impact on Washington's business
climate by creating complexity and inconsistencies for taxpayers;

(c) City gross receipts
tax revenue provides a sizable portion of city revenue that is used for
essential services;

(d) Local government
services contribute to a healthy business climate; and

(e) Cities have and
should retain the flexibility to tailor their tax structures to meet unique
local needs, but that flexibility must be balanced with predictability and ease
of administration of city gross receipts taxes.

(2) Therefore, it is
the intent of the legislature to:

(a) Require cities that
impose a gross receipts tax to adopt a model ordinance that creates a more
uniform system of city gross receipts taxes;

(b) Eliminate any
potential for multiple taxation of the same gross income;

(c) Make city gross
receipts taxes simpler, more predictable, and easier to administer, while
allowing for some continued local control and flexibility for cities.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
2. MUNICIPAL GROSS RECEIPTS
TAX‑-LIMITED SCOPE. Sections 3 through 15 of this act do not apply to
gross receipts taxes on business activities that, prior to January 1, 2002,
have been historically or traditionally taxed as a utility business for
municipal tax purposes such as:

(1) A light and power
business or a natural gas distribution business, as defined in RCW 82.16.010;

(2) A telephone
business, as defined in RCW 82.04.065;

(3) Cable television
services;

(4) Sewer or water
services;

(5) Drainage services;

(6) Solid waste
services; or

(7) Steam services.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
3. MUNICIPAL GROSS RECEIPTS
TAX‑-DEFINITIONS. The definitions in this section apply throughout this
chapter unless the context clearly requires otherwise:

(1)
"Business" has the same meaning as that provided in RCW 82.04.140.

(2) "City"
means a city, town, or code city.

(3) "Business and
occupation tax" or "gross receipts tax" means a tax which is
imposed on or measured by the value of products, the gross income of the
business, or the gross proceeds of sales, as the case may be and which is also
not, pursuant to law or custom, separately stated from the sales price. As
used throughout this chapter, the terms "value of products,"
"gross income of the business," and "gross proceeds of
sales" have the same meaning as those provided in chapter 82.04 RCW.

(4) "Local
jurisdiction" means any city, town, code city, county, municipal district
or corporation, political subdivision, Indian reservation, or federal area
located in the state of Washington.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
4. MUNICIPAL GROSS RECEIPTS
TAX‑-MODEL ORDINANCE. (1)(a) The association of Washington cities shall
form a model ordinance development committee made up of a representative
sampling of large, medium, and small cities that currently impose a gross
receipts tax. By September 1, 2003, this committee shall develop and adopt a
model ordinance regarding municipal gross receipts taxes in accordance with the
provisions of this chapter. The committee shall develop the model ordinance
and any subsequent amendments using a process that includes substantial input
from business stakeholders and other members of the public. Input shall be
solicited from statewide business associations and from local chambers of
commerce and downtown business associations in cities that levy a gross
receipts tax.

(b) The municipal
research and services center shall post the officially adopted version of the
model ordinance and a summary of any stakeholder input on its internet web site
and shall have paper copies available upon request. Additionally, a city that
imposes a gross receipts tax must make copies of its full and complete gross
receipts tax ordinance available in both electronic and paper form. The model
ordinance and accompanying information shall also be made available to the
department of revenue taxpayer information services division and the department
of licensing master license program.

(c) The definitions and
tax classifications provided in the model ordinance may not be amended more
frequently than once every four years. However, the model ordinance may be
amended at any time to comply with changes in state law. Any amendment made to
the model ordinance under this subsection (1)(c) shall be posted on the
internet web site of the municipal research and services center at least one
hundred twenty days prior to the effective date of the amendment. In addition,
any amendment to a mandatory provision of the model ordinance must be uniformly
adopted with the same effective date by all cities imposing a gross receipts
tax.

(2) The model ordinance
must contain, at a minimum, the following, mandatory provisions:

(a) The following core
definitions from the state business and occupation tax: RCW 82.04.030
("Person," "company"); RCW 82.04.040 ("Sale,"
"casual or isolated sale"); RCW 82.04.050 ("Sale at retail,"
"retail sale"); RCW 82.04.060 ("Sale at wholesale,"
"wholesale sale"); RCW 82.04.070 ("Gross proceeds of
sales"); RCW 82.04.080 ("Gross income of the business"); RCW
82.04.090 ("Value proceeding or accruing"); RCW 82.04.100
("Extractor"); RCW 82.04.110 ("Manufacturer"); RCW
82.04.120 ("To manufacture"); RCW 82.04.130 ("Commercial or
industrial use"); RCW 82.04.140 ("Business"); RCW 82.04.150
("Engaging in business"); and RCW 82.04.190 ("Consumer").
The incorporation of these core definitions in the model ordinance shall be
construed to include, as an extension of each definition, any state level
determination, regulation, interpretation, or court opinion pertaining to any
one of these definitions. In addition, if the model ordinance or an individual
city uses a classification, exemption, deduction or credit substantially
similar to one set forth in the state's gross receipts tax system, the
definitions used for the classification, exemption, deduction, or credit shall
be identical to those provided in the state's gross receipts business and
occupation tax system. However, this subsection (2) shall not be construed to
limit any individual city's flexibility to establish its own classifications or
rate structures for gross receipts tax purposes subject to the provisions of
RCW 35.21.710 nor shall it be construed to reduce, limit, or eliminate a city's
ability to continue to tax an activity at the rate established for an activity
prior to January 1, 2002, pursuant to either a gross receipts tax or utility
tax;

(b) The system of
credits contained in section 6 of this act and a form for such use;

(c) A uniform, minimum
small business tax exemption of at least the equivalent of twenty‑five
thousand dollars in gross income. A city may elect to deviate from this
requirement by creating a higher threshold, but it shall not deviate lower than
the level required in this subsection (2)(c). A city with a small business tax
exemption or threshold in excess of that provided in this subsection (2)(c)
prior to January 1, 2001, shall retain its current threshold;

(d) Tax reporting
frequencies that meet the requirements of section 8 of this act;

(e) Penalty and
interest provisions that meet the requirements of sections 9 and 10 of this
act;

(f) Claim periods that
meet the requirements of section 11 of this act;

(g) Refund provisions
that meet the requirements of section 12 of this act.

(3) Except for the
system of credits developed to address multiple taxation under subsection
(2)(b) of this section, the model ordinance may adopt its own provisions for
tax exemptions, tax credits, and tax deductions.

(4) In drafting the
mandatory definitions required under subsection (2)(a) of this section, the
committee established in subsection (1)(a) of this section shall, by December
1, 2003, develop recommendations to the legislature regarding possible
amendments to the state's gross receipts tax definitions to make them more
clear, concise, understandable, and easier to administer as part of the model
ordinance.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
5. MUNICIPAL GROSS RECEIPTS
TAX‑-MODEL ORDINANCE ADOPTION REQUIRED. (1) A city with a population of
fifty thousand or more and imposing a gross receipts tax must adopt and
implement, at a minimum, the mandatory provisions of the model ordinance
provided in section 4 of this act by January 1, 2004. However, if a definition
required to be adopted as a mandatory provision of the model ordinance under
section 4(2)(a) of this act would cause a city with a population of fifty thousand
or more to lose more than ten percent of the total gross receipts taxes
received by that city, the city may delay the adoption of that particular
definition until January 1, 2005.

(2) A city with a
population of less than fifty thousand and imposing a gross receipts tax must
adopt and implement, at a minimum, the mandatory provisions of the model
ordinance provided in section 4 of this act by January 1, 2005. However, if a
definition required to be adopted as a mandatory provision of the model ordinance
under section 4(2)(a) of this act would cause a city with a population of less
than fifty thousand to lose more than ten percent of the total gross receipts
taxes received by that city, the city may delay the adoption of that particular
definition until January 1, 2006.

(3) While it is the
intent of the legislature to allow some deviation from the nonmandatory
provisions of the model ordinance, cities are encouraged to deviate as little
as possible from the nonmandatory portions of the model ordinance to maintain
the highest degree of uniformity among the cities imposing a gross receipts
tax. If a city chooses to deviate from the nonmandatory provisions of the
model ordinance, the deviation should be noted along with an explanatory
statement regarding the deviation. Both the deviation and the explanatory
statement shall then be placed in a centralized depository such as the
municipal research and services center to provide taxpayers with quick access
to all deviations in both paper and electronic form.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
6. MUNICIPAL GROSS RECEIPTS
TAX‑-MULTIPLE TAXATION‑-CREDIT SYSTEM. (1) It is the intent of the
legislature in providing the system of credits in subsections (3)(a) and (b) of
this section to eliminate any circumstance that would result in any city or
multiple cities imposing a gross receipts business and occupation tax on
greater than one hundred percent of the gross income of the business.

(2)(a) Persons who
engage in business activities that are within the purview of more than one
classification of a gross receipts business and occupation tax shall be taxable
under each applicable classification.

(b) Notwithstanding
anything to the contrary in this section, if imposition of the tax would place
an undue burden upon interstate commerce or violate other constitutional
requirements, a taxpayer shall be allowed a credit to the extent necessary to
preserve the validity of the tax.

(3)(a) Every person
engaged in manufacturing activities is allowed a credit against the measure of
tax of any manufacturing gross receipts tax imposed by a local jurisdiction for
any portion of the measure of tax which has been previously subjected to a local
jurisdiction gross receipts tax on either extracting or previously performed
manufacturing activities.

(b) Every person
engaged in making retail or wholesale sales is allowed a credit against the
measure of tax of any retailing or wholesaling gross receipts tax imposed by a
local jurisdiction for any portion of the measure of tax which has been
previously subjected to a local jurisdiction gross receipts tax on either
extracting or manufacturing activities.

(c) The model ordinance
provided for in section 4 of this act shall be drafted to address the issue of
multiple taxation for those tax classifications that are in addition to those
enumerated in (a) and (b) of this subsection. The objective of any such
provisions shall be to eliminate multiple taxation of the same income by two or
more cities through the use of credits against the measure of tax.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
7. MUNICIPAL GROSS RECEIPTS
TAX‑-NEXUS. A city may not impose a gross receipts tax on a person
unless that person has nexus with the city. For the purposes of this section,
the term "nexus" means business activities conducted by a person
sufficient to subject that person to the taxing jurisdiction of a city under
the standards established for interstate commerce under the commerce clause of
the United States Constitution.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
8. MUNICIPAL GROSS RECEIPTS
TAX‑-REPORTING FREQUENCY. A city that imposes a gross receipts tax shall
allow reporting and payment of tax on a monthly, quarterly, or annual basis.
The frequency for any particular person may be assigned at the discretion of
the city, except that monthly reporting may be assigned only if it can be
demonstrated that the taxpayer is remitting excise tax to the state on a
monthly basis. For persons assigned a monthly frequency, payment is due within
the same time period provided for monthly taxpayers under RCW 82.32.045(1).
For persons assigned a quarterly or annual frequency, payment is due within the
same time period as provided for quarterly or annual frequency under RCW
82.32.045(2).

NEW SECTION. Sec.
9. MUNICIPAL GROSS RECEIPTS
TAX‑-PENALTIES AND INTEREST. (1) A city that imposes a gross receipts
tax shall compute interest charged a taxpayer on an underpaid tax or penalty in
accordance with RCW 82.32.050.

(2) A city that imposes
a gross receipts tax shall compute interest paid on refunds or credits of
amounts paid or other recovery allowed a taxpayer in accordance with RCW
82.32.060.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
10. MUNICIPAL BUSINESS AND
OCCUPATION TAX‑-PENALTIES. A city that imposes a gross receipts tax
shall provide for the imposition of penalties as follows:

(1) If payment of any
tax due on a return to be filed by a taxpayer is not received by the city by
the due date, the taxpayer shall be charged a penalty equivalent to that
provided in RCW 82.32.090(1).

(2) If payment of any
tax assessed by the city is not received by the city by the due date specified in
the notice, or any extension, the city shall add a penalty equivalent to that
provided in RCW 82.32.090(2).

(3) If a warrant is
issued by the city for the collection of taxes, increases, and penalties, a
penalty equivalent to that provided in RCW 82.32.090(3) shall be added to it.

(4) If the city, code
city, or town finds that all or any part of a deficiency resulted from the
disregard of specific written instructions as to reporting or tax liabilities,
the city shall add a penalty equivalent to that provided in RCW 82.32.090(4).
A taxpayer disregards specific written instructions when the city has informed
the taxpayer in writing of the taxpayer's tax obligations and the taxpayer
fails to act in accordance with those instructions unless the city has not
issued final instructions because the matter is under appeal. The city shall
not assess the penalty under this section upon any taxpayer who has made a good
faith effort to comply with the specific written instructions provided by the
city to that taxpayer. Specific written instructions may be given as a part of
a tax assessment, audit, determination, or closing agreement, provided that
specific written instructions apply only to the taxpayer addressed or
referenced on the documents. Any specific written instructions by the city
shall be clearly identified as such and shall inform the taxpayer that failure
to follow the instructions may subject the taxpayer to the penalties imposed by
this subsection.

(5) If the city finds
that all or any part of the deficiency resulted from an intent to evade the
tax, a further penalty equivalent to that provided in RCW 82.32.090(5) shall be
added.

(6) The aggregate of
penalties imposed under subsections (1), (2), and (3) of this section shall not
exceed the limit for penalties provided in RCW 82.32.090(6). This subsection
does not prohibit or restrict the application of other penalties authorized by
law.

(7) The city may not
impose both the evasion penalty and the penalty for disregarding specific
written instructions on the same tax found to be due.

(8) For the purposes of
this section, "return" means any document a person is required by the
city to file to satisfy or establish a tax obligation that is administered by
the city and that has a due date defined by ordinance.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
11. MUNICIPAL GROSS RECEIPTS
TAX‑-CLAIM PERIOD. The provisions relating to the time period allowed
for an assessment or correction of an assessment for additional taxes,
penalties, or interest shall be substantially identical to those provided in
RCW 82.32.050(3).

NEW SECTION. Sec.
12. MUNICIPAL GROSS RECEIPTS
TAX‑-REFUND PERIOD. The provisions relating to the time period allowed
for a refund of taxes paid shall be substantially identical to those provided
in RCW 82.32.060 (1) and (2).

NEW SECTION. Sec.
13. MUNICIPAL GROSS RECEIPTS
TAX‑-APPORTIONMENT PROVISIONS. (1) For the purposes of apportioning or
allocating gross income of the business for city gross receipts taxes:

(a) The total tax
measure apportioned or allocated to all applicable local jurisdictions shall
not exceed the total tax measure computed by the state for the purpose of state
gross receipts taxation.

(b) All state and
federal constitutional provisions and laws pertaining to the establishment of
due process and commerce clause protections for the taxation of interstate commerce
are duly applicable to the establishment of due process and commerce clause
protections for the taxation of intrastate commerce.

(2) The following
specific guidelines shall be applied by any city that imposes a gross receipts
tax:

(a) For the purposes of
imposing a gross receipts tax on extracting, manufacturing, or processing for
hire activities, the activities are subject to tax in the local jurisdiction
where the activities occur. If the activities occur in more than one local
jurisdiction, the activities are consistently, equitably, and reasonably
apportioned between or among those local jurisdictions even though the taxpayer
may not have an office or other permanent place of business in each
jurisdiction.

(b) For the purposes of
imposing a gross receipts tax on retail sales, all sales are subject to tax in
the local jurisdiction where the sales occur. For the purposes of determining
where a retail sale occurs under this subsection (2)(b), the methods provided
in RCW 82.14.020 (1) through (5) for determining where a retail sale occurs
apply.

(c) For the purposes of
imposing a gross receipts tax on wholesale sales, all sales are subject to tax
in the local jurisdiction where the sales occur. For the purposes of
determining where a wholesale sale occurs under this subsection, the methods
provided in RCW 82.14.020 (1) through (5) for determining where a retail sale
occurs apply as if the wholesale sale was a retail sale.

(d) For the purposes of
imposing a gross receipts tax on any person rendering services, other than
services defined as a retail sale under RCW 82.04.050, the services are subject
to tax in the local jurisdiction where the services were primarily performed.
If the person rendering services performs substantial service activities in
more than one local jurisdiction, the person shall apportion to each local
jurisdiction that portion of the total gross income that is derived from
services rendered in each local jurisdiction. Where apportionment cannot be
accurately made by separate accounting methods, the person shall apportion to
each local jurisdiction that proportion of the total gross income which is
derived from services which the cost of performing the services within a local
jurisdiction bears to the total cost of performing the services in all local
jurisdictions. The city shall apportion the gross receipts derived from
services even though the taxpayer may not have an office or other permanent
place of business in each jurisdiction where it performs the services.

(e) Under no
circumstances may a business apportion or allocate gross receipts to a
jurisdiction in which it has no nexus for tax purposes.

(f) Upon the effective
date of this section, the model ordinance developed under section 4 of this act
shall not contain any provisions relating to the apportionment or allocation of
gross income.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
14. MUNICIPAL GROSS RECEIPTS
TAX‑-APPORTIONMENT PROVISIONS STUDY. The department of revenue shall
work with the association of Washington cities and the business community to
study the possible impacts of section 13 of this act regarding the issues of
apportionment and allocation of income as they relate to cities, businesses
engaged in business solely within the boundaries of a single, local
jurisdiction, and businesses engaged in business within multiple local
jurisdictions. In conducting the study, the department shall perform an
independent analysis of the specific revenue impacts to cities, if any, which
may occur when section 13 of this act is implemented. If the department
determines that revenue impacts are anticipated as a result of the
implementation of section 13 of this act, it shall, on January 1, 2004, make
recommendations to the governor and the fiscal committees of the legislature
regarding actions the legislature could take to mitigate the financial impact.
In addition to methods offered by the department to financially mitigate any
impact, the recommendations may also include the substantive alteration or
repeal of section 13 of this act.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
15. MUNICIPAL GROSS RECEIPTS
TAX‑-IMPLEMENTATION BY CITIES‑-CONTINGENT AUTHORITY. A city that
has not complied with the model ordinance adoption requirements of section 5 of
this act may not impose a gross receipts tax on business activities subject to
the mandatory provisions of the model ordinance.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
16. MUNICIPAL GROSS RECEIPTS
TAX‑-PREEMPTION OF GROSS RECEIPTS TAXATION OF INTELLECTUAL PROPERTY. (1)
A city shall not impose a gross receipts tax upon any intellectual property
creating activity. However, nothing in this section shall be construed to
prohibit a city from imposing a gross receipts tax on the sale of tangible
personal property or services that include the benefits from intellectual
property creating activities.

(2) For the purposes of
this section, "intellectual property creating activity" means
research, development, authorship, creation, or general or specific inventive
activity without regard to whether the intellectual property creating activity
results in the creation of patents, trademarks, trade secrets, matter subject
to copyright, or any other intellectual property.

Sec. 17. RCW 82.32.060 and 1999 c
358 s 13 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) If, upon receipt of
an application by a taxpayer for a refund or for an audit of the taxpayer's
records, or upon an examination of the returns or records of any taxpayer, it
is determined by the department that within the statutory period for assessment
of taxes, penalties, or interest prescribed by RCW 82.32.050 any amount of tax,
penalty, or interest has been paid in excess of that properly due, the excess
amount paid within, or attributable to, such period shall be credited to the
taxpayer's account or shall be refunded to the taxpayer, at the taxpayer's
option. Except as provided in subsections (2) and (3) of this section, no
refund or credit shall be made for taxes, penalties, or interest paid more than
four years prior to the beginning of the calendar year in which the refund
application is made or examination of records is completed.

(2) The execution of a
written waiver under RCW 82.32.050 or 82.32.100 shall extend the time for
making a refund or credit of any taxes paid during, or attributable to, the
years covered by the waiver if, prior to the expiration of the waiver period,
an application for refund of such taxes is made by the taxpayer or the
department discovers a refund or credit is due.

(3) Notwithstanding the
foregoing limitations there shall be refunded or credited to taxpayers engaged
in the performance of United States government contracts or subcontracts the
amount of any tax paid, measured by that portion of the amounts received from
the United States, which the taxpayer is required by contract or applicable
federal statute to refund or credit to the United States, if claim for such
refund is filed by the taxpayer with the department within one year of the date
that the amount of the refund or credit due to the United States is finally
determined and filed within four years of the date on which the tax was paid:
PROVIDED, That no interest shall be allowed on such refund.

(4) Any such refunds
shall be made by means of vouchers approved by the department and by the
issuance of state warrants drawn upon and payable from such funds as the
legislature may provide. However, taxpayers who are required to pay taxes by
electronic funds transfer under RCW 82.32.080 shall have any refunds paid by
electronic funds transfer.

(5) Any judgment for
which a recovery is granted by any court of competent jurisdiction, not
appealed from, for tax, penalties, and interest which were paid by the
taxpayer, and costs, in a suit by any taxpayer shall be paid in the same
manner, as provided in subsection (4) of this section, upon the filing with the
department of a certified copy of the order or judgment of the court.

(a) Interest at the
rate of three percent per annum shall be allowed by the department and by any
court on the amount of any refund, credit, or other recovery allowed to a
taxpayer for taxes, penalties, or interest paid by the taxpayer before January
1, 1992. This rate of interest shall apply for all interest allowed through
December 31, 1998. Interest allowed after December 31, 1998, shall be computed
at the rate as computed under RCW 82.32.050(2). The rate so computed shall be
adjusted on the first day of January of each year for use in computing interest
for that calendar year.

(b) For refunds or
credits of amounts paid or other recovery allowed to a taxpayer after December
31, 1991, the rate of interest shall be the rate as computed for assessments
under RCW 82.32.050(2) less one percent. This rate of interest shall apply for
all interest allowed through December 31, 1998. Interest allowed after
December 31, 1998, shall be computed at the rate as computed under RCW
82.32.050(2). The rate so computed shall be adjusted on the first day of
January of each year for use in computing interest for that calendar year.

(6)(a) Interest
allowed on a credit notice or refund issued after July 1, 2002, shall be
computed from the last day of each calendar year containing the overpayment,
and the last day of the final month included in a credit notice or refund if
not the end of a calendar year.

(b) The department's
credit notices shall include any applicable interest. Interest allowed with a
credit notice shall accrue up to the date the taxpayer could reasonably be
expected to use the credit notice, as defined by the department's rules.

(c) If a credit
notice is converted to a refund, interest shall be recomputed to the date the
refund is issued, but not to exceed the amount of interest that would have been
allowed with the credit notice.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
18. CAPTIONS. Captions used
in this act are not any part of the law.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
19. CODIFICATION. Sections 1
through 16, 18, and 20 of this act constitute a new chapter in Title 35 RCW.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
20. EFFECTIVE DATES. (1)
Section 13 of this act takes effect January 1, 2005.

(2)
Section 17 of this act takes effect July 1, 2002.

---
END ---