BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF
WASHINGTON:

PART I - ACCOUNTABILITY FOR TRANSPORTATION PROJECTS AND PROGRAMS

NEW SECTION. Sec.
101. It is essential that the
legislature improve the accountability and efficiency of the department of
transportation. Taxpayers must know that their tax dollars are being well
spent to deliver critically needed transportation projects. To accomplish this,
an independent transportation accountability board must be established to
provide citizen oversight on these transportation projects. The board will
report back to the public on how their tax dollars are spent on projects funded
by new transportation taxes.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
102. (1) The transportation
accountability board is created.

(2) The board will
consist of no fewer than five and no more than nine members appointed by the
governor for terms of four years, except that at least half the members
initially appointed will be appointed for terms of two years. The members of
the board must be chosen so the council will have experience and expertise
relating to major civil engineering and construction works and facilities to
include: (a) Design, estimating, contract packaging, and procurement; (b)
construction means and methods and construction management and administration;
(c) project finance, accounting, controls, and reporting; (d) procedures for
obtaining permits and for assuring regulatory compliance; (e) dispute
resolution; (f) construction work force training and safety; (g) general public
administration; and (h) experience crafting and implementing environmental
mitigation plans. The governor shall designate one of the appointees as
chairman, and may draw on members of the Blue Ribbon Commission on
Transportation for initial appointees.

(3) The governor may
not remove members from the board before the expiration of their terms unless
for cause based upon a determination of incapacity, incompetence, neglect of
duty, or malfeasance in office by the Thurston county superior court, upon
petition and show cause proceedings brought for that purpose in that court and
directed to the board member in question.

(4) No member may be
appointed for more than three consecutive terms.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
103. (1) The board shall meet
periodically upon the call of the chairman. It may adopt its own rules and may
establish its own procedures. It shall act collectively in harmony with
recorded resolutions or motions adopted by a majority vote of the members.

(2) Each member of the
board will be compensated in accordance with RCW 43.03.250 and reimbursed for
actual necessary traveling and other expenses in going to, attending, and
returning from meetings of the board or that are incurred in the discharge of
duties requested by the chairman. However, in no event may a board member be
compensated in any year for more than one hundred twenty days, except the
chairman may be compensated for not more than one hundred fifty days. Service
on the board does not qualify as a service credit for the purposes of a public
retirement system.

(3) The board shall
keep proper records and is subject to audit by the state auditor or other
auditing entities.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
104. (1) Staff support to the
board must be provided by the joint legislative audit and review committee,
which shall provide professional support for the duties, functions,
responsibilities, and activities of the board, including but not limited to
information technology systems; data collection, processing, analysis, and
reporting; project management; and office space, equipment, and secretarial
support.

(2) The board may from
time to time retain planners, consultants, and other technical personnel to
advise it in the performance of its duties.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
105. The transportation
accountability board shall serve as a single, independent point of
accountability for reporting, analyzing, and monitoring the department's
performance in delivering improvement projects and programs funded with new
revenues. The department of transportation and the transportation commission
must work cooperatively with the board to carry out the purposes of this
chapter. The board has the following responsibilities:

(1) Direct the
department of transportation to submit a quarterly audit report as required
under section 106 of this act;

(2) Report annually to
the governor and the legislature on the department's progress on each project
as further defined in section 108 of this act;

(3) When necessary,
make policy recommendations for improving efficiencies, savings or improvements
in the department's project management, accountability measures, or project
delivery mechanisms;

(4) Recommend any
leading edge transportation project delivery strategies, oversight,
accountability, or efficiency measures.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
106. The department of
transportation shall prepare and submit to the transportation commission once
each quarter, a comprehensive audit report on each transportation project
funded by this act. At a minimum, the audit report must include the following
elements:

(1) Project status and
any scope changes;

(2) Estimated
completion date and cost, noting any changes from past estimates;

(3) Actual project
expenditures as compared with projected expenditures;

(4) Any changes in
financing for each project;

(5) Claim or change
orders that result in greater than a five percent cumulative increase in
project cost, or greater than sixty days of delay;

(6) Status of any
required permits;

(7) Mitigation efforts
to relieve both traffic and environmental impacts;

(8) Evaluation of work
force effectiveness, including both state employees and contractors;

(9) Outlook for the
upcoming year, including projected accomplishments and challenges;

(10) Copies of any
accountability reports filed with the federal highway administration;

(11) Any other useful
information the board requests.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
107. The transportation
commission must review the proposed audit report submitted by the department.
After reviewing the information contained therein, the commission may request
additional information or data, or ask for clarifications. The commission is
prohibited from changing any of the data contained in the audit report.

After conducting its
review, the commission must forward the audit report to the transportation
accountability board.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
108. (1) Upon completion of
its review under section 107 of this act, the transportation commission shall
forward the quarterly audit report to the transportation accountability board.
The transportation accountability board will accept or reject the audit report.

(a) In determining
whether to accept or reject the audit report, the board:

(i) Will analyze,
investigate, and evaluate the data contained in the quarterly audit report;

(ii) Will receive staff
support for this evaluation from the joint legislative audit and review
committee; and

(iii) May request
additional information or data from the department of transportation.

(b) As part of the
evaluation process, the board may make recommendations to the department and
the transportation commission for efficiencies, savings, or improvements in the
department's project management, accountability measures or project delivery mechanisms.
The chairman will work with the department and the transportation commission on
behalf of the board to implement changes recommended by the board.

(2) Upon final
acceptance, the board must forward the audit report to the transportation
standing committees of the house of representatives and senate, and to the
office of financial management, along with any recommendations the board makes
under section 105 of this act.

(3) The board must
publish and make the audit report available to the public in both print and
electronic media.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
109. Sections 101 through 108
of this act constitute a new chapter in Title 47 RCW.

PART II - COMBINED LICENSING FEE

Sec. 201. RCW 46.16.070 and 1994 c
262 s 8 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) In lieu of all
other vehicle licensing fees, unless specifically exempt, and in addition to ((the
excise tax prescribed in chapter 82.44 RCW and)) the mileage fees
prescribed for buses and stages in RCW 46.16.125, there shall be paid and
collected annually for each truck, motor truck, truck tractor, road tractor,
tractor, bus, auto stage, or for hire vehicle with seating capacity of more
than six, based upon the declared combined gross weight or declared gross
weight ((thereof)) pursuant to the provisions of chapter 46.44 RCW, the
following licensing fees by such gross weight:

((DECLARED GROSS WEIGHT SCHEDULE
A SCHEDULE B

4,000 lbs. $ 37.00 $ 37.00

6,000 lbs. $ 44.00 $ 44.00

8,000 lbs. $ 55.00 $ 55.00

10,000 lbs. $ 62.00 $ 62.00

12,000 lbs. $ 72.00 $ 72.00

14,000 lbs. $ 82.00 $ 82.00

16,000 lbs. $ 92.00 $ 92.00

18,000 lbs. $ 137.00 $ 137.00

20,000 lbs. $ 152.00 $ 152.00

22,000 lbs. $ 164.00 $ 164.00

24,000 lbs. $ 177.00 $ 177.00

26,000 lbs. $ 187.00 $ 187.00

28,000 lbs. $ 220.00 $ 220.00

30,000 lbs. $ 253.00 $ 253.00

32,000 lbs. $ 304.00 $ 304.00

34,000 lbs. $ 323.00 $ 323.00

36,000 lbs. $ 350.00 $ 350.00

38,000 lbs. $ 384.00 $ 384.00

40,000 lbs. $ 439.00 $ 439.00

42,000 lbs. $ 456.00 $ 546.00

44,000 lbs. $ 466.00 $ 556.00

46,000 lbs. $ 501.00 $ 591.00

48,000 lbs. $ 522.00 $ 612.00

50,000 lbs. $ 566.00 $ 656.00

52,000 lbs. $ 595.00 $ 685.00

54,000 lbs. $ 642.00 $ 732.00

56,000 lbs. $ 677.00 $ 767.00

58,000 lbs. $ 704.00 $ 794.00

60,000 lbs. $ 750.00 $ 840.00

62,000 lbs. $ 804.00 $ 894.00

64,000 lbs. $ 822.00 $ 912.00

66,000 lbs. $ 915.00 $ 1,005.00

68,000 lbs. $ 954.00 $ 1,044.00

70,000 lbs. $ 1,027.00 $ 1,117.00

72,000 lbs. $ 1,098.00 $ 1,188.00

74,000 lbs. $ 1,193.00 $ 1,283.00

76,000 lbs. $ 1,289.00 $ 1,379.00

78,000 lbs. $ 1,407.00 $ 1,497.00

80,000 lbs. $ 1,518.00 $ 1,608.00

82,000 lbs. $ 1,623.00 $ 1,713.00

84,000 lbs. $ 1,728.00 $ 1,818.00

86,000 lbs. $ 1,833.00 $ 1,923.00

88,000 lbs. $ 1,938.00 $ 2,028.00

90,000 lbs. $ 2,043.00 $ 2,133.00

92,000 lbs. $ 2,148.00 $ 2,238.00

94,000 lbs. $ 2,253.00 $ 2,343.00

96,000 lbs. $ 2,358.00 $ 2,448.00

98,000 lbs. $ 2,463.00 $ 2,553.00

100,000 lbs. $ 2,568.00 $ 2,658.00

102,000 lbs. $ 2,673.00 $ 2,763.00

104,000 lbs. $ 2,778.00 $ 2,868.00

105,500 lbs. $ 2,883.00 $ 2,973.00))

Effective

Gross October
1, 2002, Effective

Weight through September
30, 2003 October 1, 2003

Schedule A Schedule
B Schedule A Schedule B

4,000 $37 $37 $37 $37

6,000 44 44 44 44

8,000 55 55 55 55

10,000 62 62 62 62

12,000 77 77 81 81

14,000 88 88 93 93

16,000 99 99 105 105

18,000 148 148 159 159

20,000 165 165 177 177

22,000 178 178 192 192

24,000 192 192 207 207

26,000 203 203 219 219

28,000 239 239 259 259

30,000 276 276 298 298

32,000 332 332 360 360

34,000 353 353 382 382

36,000 382 382 415 415

38,000 420 420 456 456

40,000 480 480 522 522

42,000 499 589 542 632

44,000 510 600 554 644

46,000 549 639 596 686

48,000 572 662 621 711

50,000 620 710 674 764

52,000 652 742 709 799

54,000 704 794 765 855

56,000 742 832 807 897

58,000 772 862 840 930

60,000 822 912 895 985

62,000 882 972 960 1,050

64,000 902 992 981 1,071

66,000 1,004 1,094 1,093 1,183

68,000 1,047 1,137 1,140 1,230

70,000 1,127 1,217 1,227 1,317

72,000 1,205 1,295 1,312 1,402

74,000 1,310 1,400 1,426 1,516

76,000 1,415 1,505 1,542 1,632

78,000 1,545 1.635 1,683 1,773

80,000 1,667 1,757 1,816 1,906

82,000 1,783 1,873 1,942 2,032

84,000 1,898 1,988 2,068 2,158

86,000 2,014 2,104 2,194 2,284

88,000 2,129 2,219 2,320 2,410

90,000 2,245 2,335 2,446 2,536

92,000 2,360 2,450 2,572 2,662

94,000 2,476 2,566 2,698 2,788

96,000 2,591 2,681 2,824 2,914

98,000 2,707 2,797 2,950 3,040

100,000 2,822 2,912 3,076 3,166

102,000 2,938 3,028 3,202 3,292

104,000 3,053 3,143 3,328 3,418

105,500 3,169 3,259 3,454 3,544

Schedule A applies to
vehicles either used exclusively for hauling logs or that do not tow trailers.
Schedule B applies to vehicles that tow trailers and are not covered under
Schedule A.

(2) Every truck,
motor truck, truck tractor, and tractor exceeding 6,000 pounds empty scale
weight registered under chapter 46.16, 46.87, or 46.88 RCW shall be licensed
for not less than one hundred fifty percent of its empty weight unless the
amount would be in excess of the legal limits prescribed for such a vehicle in
RCW 46.44.041 or 46.44.042, in which event the vehicle shall be licensed for
the maximum weight authorized for such a vehicle or unless the vehicle is used
only for the purpose of transporting any well drilling machine, air compressor,
rock crusher, conveyor, hoist, donkey engine, cook house, tool house, bunk
house, or similar machine or structure attached to or made a part of such
vehicle.

(3) The following
provisions apply when increasing gross or combined gross weight for a vehicle
licensed under this section:

(a) The new license fee
will be one-twelfth of the fee listed above for the new gross weight,
multiplied by the number of months remaining in the period for which licensing
fees have been paid, including the month in which the new gross weight is
effective.

(b) Upon surrender of
the current certificate of registration or cab card, the new licensing fees due
shall be reduced by the amount of the licensing fees previously paid for the
same period for which new fees are being charged.

(((2))) (4)
The proceeds from the fees collected under ((subsection (1) of)) this
section shall be distributed in accordance with RCW 46.68.035.

Sec. 202. RCW 46.68.035 and 2000
2nd sp.s. c 4 s 8 are each amended to read as follows:

All proceeds from
combined vehicle licensing fees received by the director for vehicles licensed
under RCW 46.16.070 and 46.16.085 shall be forwarded to the state treasurer to
be distributed into accounts according to the following method:

(1) The sum of two
dollars for each vehicle shall be deposited into the multimodal transportation
account, except that for each vehicle registered by a county auditor or agent
to a county auditor pursuant to RCW 46.01.140, the sum of two dollars shall be
credited to the current county expense fund.

(2) The remainder shall
be distributed as follows:

(a) 23.677 percent of
the proceeds collected on the rate in effect September 30, 2002, shall be
deposited into the state patrol highway account of the motor vehicle fund;

(b) 1.521 percent of
the proceeds collected on the rate in effect September 30, 2002, shall be
deposited into the Puget Sound ferry operations account of the motor vehicle
fund; ((and))

(c) ((The remaining))
74.802 percent of the proceeds collected on the rate in effect on
September 30, 2002, shall be deposited into the motor vehicle fund; and

(d) The remaining
proceeds collected on the difference between the current rate and the rate in
effect on September 30, 2002, shall be deposited in the freight mobility
strategic investment account.

PART III - FUEL TAX

Sec. 301. RCW 82.36.025 and 1999 c
269 s 16 and 1999 c 94 s 29 are each reenacted and amended to read as follows:

(1) A motor
vehicle fuel tax rate of twenty-three cents per gallon ((shall apply)) applies
to the sale, distribution, or use of motor vehicle fuel.

(2) Beginning
October 1, 2002, an additional and cumulative motor vehicle fuel tax rate of
four cents per gallon applies to the sale, distribution, or use of motor
vehicle fuel.

(3) Beginning
October 1, 2003, an additional and cumulative motor vehicle fuel tax rate of
four cents per gallon applies to the sale, distribution, or use of motor
vehicle fuel.

Sec. 302. RCW 46.68.090 and 1999 c
269 s 2 and 1999 c 94 s 6 are each reenacted and amended to read as follows:

(1) All moneys that
have accrued or may accrue to the motor vehicle fund from the motor vehicle
fuel tax and special fuel tax shall be first expended for purposes enumerated
in (a) and (b) of this subsection. The remaining net tax amount shall be
distributed monthly by the state treasurer in ((the proportions set forth in
(c) through (l) of this)) accordance with subsections (2) through
(4) of this section.

(a) For payment of
refunds of motor vehicle fuel tax and special fuel tax that has been paid and
is refundable as provided by law;

(b) For payment of
amounts to be expended pursuant to appropriations for the administrative
expenses of the offices of state treasurer, state auditor, and the department
of licensing of the state of Washington in the administration of the motor
vehicle fuel tax and the special fuel tax, which sums shall be distributed
monthly((;)).

(((c))) (2)
All of the remaining net tax amount collected under RCW 82.36.025(1) and
82.38.030(1) must be distributed in the proportions set forth in (a) through
(j) of this subsection.

(a) For
distribution to the motor vehicle fund an amount equal to 44.387 percent to be
expended for highway purposes of the state, as defined in RCW 46.68.130;

(((d))) (b)
For distribution to the special category C account, hereby created in the motor
vehicle fund, an amount equal to 3.2609 percent to be expended for special
category C projects. Special category C projects are category C projects that,
due to high cost only, will require bond financing to complete construction.

The following criteria,
listed in order of priority, shall be used in determining which special
category C projects have the highest priority:

(i) Accident
experience;

(ii) Fatal accident
experience;

(iii) Capacity to move
people and goods safely and at reasonable speeds without undue congestion; and

(iv) Continuity of
development of the highway transportation network.

Moneys deposited in the
special category C account in the motor vehicle fund may be used for payment of
debt service on bonds the proceeds of which are used to finance special
category C projects under this subsection (((1)(d))) (2)(b);

(((e))) (c)
For distribution to the Puget Sound ferry operations account in the motor
vehicle fund an amount equal to 2.3283 percent;

(((f))) (d)
For distribution to the Puget Sound capital construction account in the motor
vehicle fund an amount equal to 2.3726 percent;

(((g))) (e)
For distribution to the urban arterial trust account in the motor vehicle fund
an amount equal to 7.5597 percent;

(((h))) (f)
For distribution to the transportation improvement account in the motor vehicle
fund an amount equal to 5.6739 percent and expended in accordance with RCW
47.26.086;

(((i))) (g)
For distribution to the cities and towns from the motor vehicle fund an amount
equal to 10.6961 percent in accordance with RCW 46.68.110;

(((j))) (h)
For distribution to the counties from the motor vehicle fund an amount equal to
19.2287 percent: (i) Out of which there shall be distributed from time to
time, as directed by the department of transportation, those sums as may be
necessary to carry out the provisions of RCW 47.56.725; and (ii) less any
amounts appropriated to the county road administration board to implement the
provisions of RCW 47.56.725(4), with the balance of such county share to be
distributed monthly as the same accrues for distribution in accordance with RCW
46.68.120;

(((k))) (i)
For distribution to the county arterial preservation account, hereby created in
the motor vehicle fund an amount equal to 1.9565 percent. These funds shall be
distributed by the county road administration board to counties in proportions
corresponding to the number of paved arterial lane miles in the unincorporated
area of each county and shall be used for improvements to sustain the
structural, safety, and operational integrity of county arterials. The county
road administration board shall adopt reasonable rules and develop policies to
implement this program and to assure that a pavement management system is used;

(((l))) (j)
For distribution to the rural arterial trust account in the motor vehicle fund
an amount equal to 2.5363 percent and expended in accordance with RCW
36.79.020.

(((2))) (3)
All of the remaining net tax amount collected under the additional four cents
levied under RCW 82.36.025(2) and 82.38.030(2) must be distributed in the
following manner:

(a) 75 percent
distributed to the motor vehicle fund;

(b) 8.3333 percent
distributed to the transportation improvement account in the motor vehicle fund
and expended in accordance with RCW 47.26.086;

(c) 8.3333 percent
distributed to the cities and towns from the motor vehicle fund in accordance
with RCW 46.68.110;

(d) 8.3333 percent
distributed to the counties from the motor vehicle fund in accordance with RCW
46.68.120.

(4) Nothing in
this section or in RCW 46.68.130 may be construed so as to violate any terms or
conditions contained in any highway construction bond issues now or hereafter
authorized by statute and whose payment is by such statute pledged to be paid
from any excise taxes on motor vehicle fuel and special fuels.

Sec. 303. RCW 82.38.030 and 2001 c
270 s 6 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) There is hereby
levied and imposed upon special fuel users a tax at the rate ((computed in
the manner provided in RCW 82.36.025 on each)) of twenty-three cents per
gallon of special fuel, or each one hundred cubic feet of compressed natural
gas, measured at standard pressure and temperature.

(2) Beginning
October 1, 2002, an additional and cumulative special fuel tax rate of four
cents per gallon of special fuel, or each one hundred cubic feet of compressed
natural gas, measured at standard pressure and temperature is imposed on
special fuel users.

(3) Beginning
October 1, 2003, an additional and cumulative special fuel tax rate of four
cents per gallon of special fuel, or each one hundred cubic feet of compressed
natural gas, measured at standard pressure and temperature is imposed on
special fuel users.

(4) The tax ((imposed
by subsection (1) of this section)) is imposed when:

(a) Special fuel is
removed in this state from a terminal if the special fuel is removed at the
rack unless the removal is to a licensed exporter for direct delivery to a
destination outside of the state, or the removal is to a special fuel
distributor for direct delivery to an international fuel tax agreement licensee
under RCW 82.38.320;

(b) Special fuel is
removed in this state from a refinery if either of the following applies:

(i) The removal is by
bulk transfer and the refiner or the owner of the special fuel immediately
before the removal is not a licensee; or

(ii) The removal is at
the refinery rack unless the removal is to a licensed exporter for direct
delivery to a destination outside of the state, or the removal is to a special
fuel distributor for direct delivery to an international fuel tax agreement
licensee under RCW 82.38.320;

(c) Special fuel enters
into this state for sale, consumption, use, or storage if either of the
following applies:

(i) The entry is by
bulk transfer and the importer is not a licensee; or

(ii) The entry is not
by bulk transfer;

(d) Special fuel is
sold or removed in this state to an unlicensed entity unless there was a prior
taxable removal, entry, or sale of the special fuel;

(e) Blended special
fuel is removed or sold in this state by the blender of the fuel. The number
of gallons of blended special fuel subject to tax is the difference between the
total number of gallons of blended special fuel removed or sold and the number
of gallons of previously taxed special fuel used to produce the blended special
fuel;

(f) Dyed special fuel
is used on a highway, as authorized by the internal revenue code, unless the
use is exempt from the special fuel tax;

(g) Special fuel
purchased by an international fuel tax agreement licensee under RCW 82.38.320
is used on a highway; and

(h) Special fuel is
sold by a licensed special fuel supplier to a special fuel distributor, special
fuel importer, or special fuel blender and the special fuel is not removed from
the bulk transfer-terminal system.

(((3))) (5)
The tax imposed by this chapter, if required to be collected by the licensee,
is held in trust by the licensee until paid to the department, and a licensee
who appropriates or converts the tax collected to his or her own use or to any
use other than the payment of the tax to the extent that the money required to
be collected is not available for payment on the due date as prescribed in this
chapter is guilty of a felony, or gross misdemeanor in accordance with the
theft and anticipatory provisions of Title 9A RCW. A person, partnership,
corporation, or corporate officer who fails to collect the tax imposed by this
section, or who has collected the tax and fails to pay it to the department in
the manner prescribed by this chapter, is personally liable to the state for
the amount of the tax.

Sec. 304. RCW 82.38.035 and 2001 c
270 s 7 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) A licensed supplier
shall remit tax on special fuel to the department as provided in RCW
82.38.030(((2))) (4)(a). On a two-party exchange, or buy-sell
agreement between two licensed suppliers, the receiving exchange partner or
buyer shall remit the tax.

(2) A refiner shall
remit tax to the department on special fuel removed from a refinery as provided
in RCW 82.38.030(((2))) (4)(b).

(3) An importer shall
remit tax to the department on special fuel imported into this state as
provided in RCW 82.38.030(((2))) (4)(c).

(4) A blender shall
remit tax to the department on the removal or sale of blended special fuel as
provided in RCW 82.38.030(((2))) (4)(e).

(5) A dyed special fuel
user shall remit tax to the department on the use of dyed special fuel as
provided in RCW 82.38.030(((2))) (4)(f).

Sec. 305. RCW 82.38.045 and 1998 c
176 s 54 are each amended to read as follows:

A terminal operator is
jointly and severally liable for remitting the tax imposed under RCW
82.38.030(((1))) if, at the time of removal:

(1) The position holder
with respect to the special fuel is a person other than the terminal operator
and is not a licensee;

(2) The terminal
operator is not a licensee;

(3) The position holder
has an expired internal revenue service notification certificate issued under
chapter 26, C.F.R. Part 48; or

(4) The terminal
operator had reason to believe that information on the notification certificate
was false.

Sec. 306. RCW 82.38.047 and 1998 c
176 s 55 are each amended to read as follows:

A terminal operator is
jointly and severally liable for remitting the tax imposed under RCW
82.38.030(((1))) if, in connection with the removal of special fuel that
is not dyed or marked in accordance with internal revenue service requirements,
the terminal operator provides a person with a bill of lading, shipping paper,
or similar document indicating that the special fuel is dyed or marked in accordance
with internal revenue service requirements.

Sec. 307. RCW 82.38.075 and 1983 c
212 s 1 are each amended to read as follows:

In order to encourage
the use of nonpolluting fuels, an annual license fee in lieu of the tax imposed
by RCW 82.38.030 shall be imposed upon the use of natural gas as defined in
this chapter or on liquified petroleum gas, commonly called propane, which is
used in any motor vehicle, as defined in RCW 46.04.320, which shall be based
upon the following schedule as adjusted by the formula set out below:

VEHICLE
TONNAGE (GVW) FEE

0
- 6,000 $ 45

6,001 -
10,000 $ 45

10,001 -
18,000 $ 80

18,001 -
28,000 $110

28,001
- 36,000 $150

36,001 and
above $250

To determine the actual
annual license fee imposed by this section for a registration year, the
appropriate dollar amount set out in the above schedule shall be multiplied by
the ((motor vehicle)) special fuel tax rate ((in cents per
gallon)) as established by RCW ((82.36.025)) 82.38.030
effective on July 1st of the preceding calendar year and the product thereof
shall be divided by 12 cents.

The department of
licensing, in addition to the foregoing fee, shall charge a further fee of five
dollars as a handling charge for each license issued.

The director of
licensing shall be authorized to prorate the vehicle tonnage fee so that the
annual license required by this section will correspond with the staggered
vehicle licensing system.

A decal or other
identifying device issued upon payment of these annual fees shall be displayed
as prescribed by the department as authority to purchase this fuel.

Persons selling or
dispensing natural gas or propane may not sell or dispense this fuel for their
own use or the use of others into tanks of vehicles powered by this fuel which
do not display a valid decal or other identifying device as provided in this section.

Vehicles registered in
jurisdictions outside the state of Washington are exempt from this section.

Any person selling or
dispensing natural gas or propane into the tank of a motor vehicle powered by
this fuel, except as prescribed in this chapter, is subject to the penalty
provisions of this chapter.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
308. A new section is added
to chapter 46.68 RCW to read as follows:

The freight mobility
strategic investment account of the motor vehicle fund is created in the state
treasury. All money deposited in the account shall be used by the department
of transportation for:

(1) Improving the
freight transportation highway system by constructing projects selected by the
freight mobility strategic investment board.

(2) The department may
pledge any money in the freight mobility strategic investment account for debt
service on bonds issued to finance projects authorized under subsection (1) of
this section.

Sec. 309. RCW 43.84.092 and 2001
2nd sp.s. c 14 s 608, 2001 c 273 s 6, 2001 c 141 s 3, and 2001 c 80 s 5 are
each reenacted and amended to read as follows:

(1) All earnings of
investments of surplus balances in the state treasury shall be deposited to the
treasury income account, which account is hereby established in the state
treasury.

(2) The treasury income
account shall be utilized to pay or receive funds associated with federal
programs as required by the federal cash management improvement act of 1990.
The treasury income account is subject in all respects to chapter 43.88 RCW,
but no appropriation is required for refunds or allocations of interest
earnings required by the cash management improvement act. Refunds of interest
to the federal treasury required under the cash management improvement act fall
under RCW 43.88.180 and shall not require appropriation. The office of
financial management shall determine the amounts due to or from the federal
government pursuant to the cash management improvement act. The office of
financial management may direct transfers of funds between accounts as deemed
necessary to implement the provisions of the cash management improvement act,
and this subsection. Refunds or allocations shall occur prior to the
distributions of earnings set forth in subsection (4) of this section.

(3) Except for the
provisions of RCW 43.84.160, the treasury income account may be utilized for
the payment of purchased banking services on behalf of treasury funds
including, but not limited to, depository, safekeeping, and disbursement
functions for the state treasury and affected state agencies. The treasury
income account is subject in all respects to chapter 43.88 RCW, but no
appropriation is required for payments to financial institutions. Payments
shall occur prior to distribution of earnings set forth in subsection (4) of
this section.

(4) Monthly, the state
treasurer shall distribute the earnings credited to the treasury income
account. The state treasurer shall credit the general fund with all the earnings
credited to the treasury income account except:

(a) The following
accounts and funds shall receive their proportionate share of earnings based
upon each account's and fund's average daily balance for the period: The
capitol building construction account, the Cedar River channel construction and
operation account, the Central Washington University capital projects account,
the charitable, educational, penal and reformatory institutions account, the
common school construction fund, the county criminal justice assistance
account, the county sales and use tax equalization account, the data processing
building construction account, the deferred compensation administrative
account, the deferred compensation principal account, the department of
retirement systems expense account, the drinking water assistance account, the
drinking water assistance administrative account, the drinking water assistance
repayment account, the Eastern Washington University capital projects account,
the education construction fund, the emergency reserve fund, the federal forest
revolving account, the health services account, the public health services
account, the health system capacity account, the personal health services
account, the state higher education construction account, the higher education
construction account, the highway infrastructure account, the industrial
insurance premium refund account, the judges' retirement account, the judicial
retirement administrative account, the judicial retirement principal account,
the local leasehold excise tax account, the local real estate excise tax
account, the local sales and use tax account, the medical aid account, the
mobile home park relocation fund, the multimodal transportation account, the
municipal criminal justice assistance account, the municipal sales and use tax
equalization account, the natural resources deposit account, the oyster reserve
land account, the perpetual surveillance and maintenance account, the public
employees' retirement system plan 1 account, the public employees' retirement
system combined plan 2 and plan 3 account, the public health supplemental
account, the Puyallup tribal settlement account, the resource management cost
account, the site closure account, the special wildlife account, the state employees'
insurance account, the state employees' insurance reserve account, the state
investment board expense account, the state investment board commingled trust
fund accounts, the supplemental pension account, the teachers' retirement
system plan 1 account, the teachers' retirement system combined plan 2 and plan
3 account, the tobacco prevention and control account, the tobacco settlement
account, the transportation infrastructure account, the tuition recovery trust
fund, the University of Washington bond retirement fund, the University of
Washington building account, the volunteer fire fighters' and reserve officers'
relief and pension principal fund, the volunteer fire fighters' and reserve
officers' administrative fund, the Washington fruit express account, the
Washington judicial retirement system account, the Washington law enforcement
officers' and fire fighters' system plan 1 retirement account, the Washington
law enforcement officers' and fire fighters' system plan 2 retirement account,
the Washington school employees' retirement system combined plan 2 and 3
account, the Washington state health insurance pool account, the Washington
state patrol retirement account, the Washington State University building
account, the Washington State University bond retirement fund, the water
pollution control revolving fund, and the Western Washington University capital
projects account. Earnings derived from investing balances of the agricultural
permanent fund, the normal school permanent fund, the permanent common school
fund, the scientific permanent fund, and the state university permanent fund
shall be allocated to their respective beneficiary accounts. All earnings to
be distributed under this subsection (4)(a) shall first be reduced by the
allocation to the state treasurer's service fund pursuant to RCW 43.08.190.

(b) The following
accounts and funds shall receive eighty percent of their proportionate share of
earnings based upon each account's or fund's average daily balance for the
period: The aeronautics account, the aircraft search and rescue account, the
county arterial preservation account, the department of licensing services
account, the essential rail assistance account, the ferry bond retirement fund,
the freight mobility strategic investment account, the grade crossing
protective fund, the high capacity transportation account, the highway bond
retirement fund, the highway safety account, the motor vehicle fund, the
motorcycle safety education account, the pilotage account, the public
transportation systems account, the Puget Sound capital construction account,
the Puget Sound ferry operations account, the recreational vehicle account, the
rural arterial trust account, the safety and education account, the special
category C account, the state patrol highway account, the transportation
equipment fund, the transportation fund, the transportation improvement
account, the transportation improvement board bond retirement account, and the
urban arterial trust account.

(5) In conformance with
Article II, section 37 of the state Constitution, no treasury accounts or funds
shall be allocated earnings without the specific affirmative directive of this
section.

Sec. 310. RCW 46.09.170 and 1995 c
166 s 9 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) From time to time,
but at least once each year, the state treasurer shall refund from the motor
vehicle fund one percent of the motor vehicle fuel tax revenues collected under
chapter 82.36 RCW, based on the tax rate in effect January 1, ((1990)) 2001,
less proper deductions for refunds and costs of collection as provided in RCW
46.68.090. The treasurer shall place these funds in the general fund as
follows:

(a) Forty percent shall
be credited to the ORV and nonhighway vehicle account and administered by the
department of natural resources solely for planning, maintenance, and
management of ORV recreation facilities, nonhighway roads, and nonhighway road
recreation facilities. The funds under this subsection shall be expended in
accordance with the following limitations:

(i) Not more than five
percent may be expended for information programs under this chapter;

(ii) Not less than ten
percent and not more than fifty percent may be expended for ORV recreation
facilities;

(iii) Not more than
twenty-five percent may be expended for maintenance of nonhighway roads;

(iv) Not more than
fifty percent may be expended for nonhighway road recreation facilities;

(v) Ten percent shall
be transferred to the interagency committee for outdoor recreation for grants
to law enforcement agencies in those counties where the department of natural
resources maintains ORV facilities. This amount is in addition to those
distributions made by the interagency committee for outdoor recreation under
(d)(i) of this subsection;

(b) Three and one-half
percent shall be credited to the ORV and nonhighway vehicle account and
administered by the department of fish and wildlife solely for the acquisition,
planning, development, maintenance, and management of nonhighway roads and
recreation facilities;

(c) Two percent shall
be credited to the ORV and nonhighway vehicle account and administered by the
parks and recreation commission solely for the maintenance and management of
ORV use areas and facilities; and

(d) Fifty-four and
one-half percent, together with the funds received by the interagency committee
for outdoor recreation under RCW 46.09.110, shall be credited to the nonhighway
and off-road vehicle activities program account to be administered by the
committee for planning, acquisition, development, maintenance, and management
of ORV recreation facilities and nonhighway road recreation facilities; ORV
user education and information; and ORV law enforcement programs. The funds
under this subsection shall be expended in accordance with the following
limitations:

(i) Not more than
twenty percent may be expended for ORV education, information, and law
enforcement programs under this chapter;

(ii) Not less than an
amount equal to the funds received by the interagency committee for outdoor
recreation under RCW 46.09.110 and not more than sixty percent may be expended
for ORV recreation facilities;

(iii) Not more than
twenty percent may be expended for nonhighway road recreation facilities.

(2) On a yearly basis
an agency may not, except as provided in RCW 46.09.110, expend more than ten
percent of the funds it receives under this chapter for general administration
expenses incurred in carrying out this chapter.

Sec. 311. RCW 46.10.170 and 1994 c
262 s 4 are each amended to read as follows:

From time to time, but
at least once each four years, the department shall determine the amount of
moneys paid to it as motor vehicle fuel tax that is tax on snowmobile fuel.
Such determination shall use one hundred thirty-five gallons as the average
yearly fuel usage per snowmobile, the number of registered snowmobiles during
the calendar year under determination, and the fuel tax rate in effect January
1, ((1990)) 2001.

Sec. 312. RCW 79A.25.070 and 2000
c 11 s 73 are each amended to read as follows:

Upon expiration of the
time limited by RCW 82.36.330 for claiming of refunds of tax on marine fuel,
the state of Washington shall succeed to the right to such refunds. The
director of licensing, after taking into account past and anticipated claims
for refunds from and deposits to the marine fuel tax refund account and the
costs of carrying out the provisions of RCW 79A.25.030, shall request the state
treasurer to transfer monthly from the marine fuel tax refund account an amount
equal to the proportion of the moneys in the account representing the motor
vehicle fuel tax rate under RCW 82.36.025 in effect on January 1, ((1990))
2001, to the recreation resource account and the remainder to the motor
vehicle fund.

PART IV - SALES TAX ON MOTOR
VEHICLES

Sec. 401. RCW 82.08.020 and 2000
2nd sp.s. c 4 s 1 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) There is levied and
there shall be collected a tax on each retail sale in this state equal to six
and five-tenths percent of the selling price.

(2) There is levied and
there shall be collected an additional tax on each retail car rental,
regardless of whether the vehicle is licensed in this state, equal to five and
nine-tenths percent of the selling price. The revenue collected under this
subsection shall be deposited in the multimodal transportation account created
in RCW 47.66.070.

(3) There is levied
and there shall be collected an additional tax on each retail sale of a motor
vehicle, as defined in RCW 46.04.320, of one percent. The revenue collected
under this subsection (3) and the revenue collected under RCW 82.12.020 based
on the rate provided in this subsection (3) will be deposited in the multimodal
transportation account under RCW 47.66.070.

(4) The taxes
imposed under this chapter shall apply to successive retail sales of the same
property.

(((4))) (5)
The rates provided in this section apply to taxes imposed under chapter 82.12
RCW as provided in RCW 82.12.020.

Sec. 402. RCW 82.12.020 and 1999 c
358 s 9 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) There is hereby
levied and there shall be collected from every person in this state a tax or
excise for the privilege of using within this state as a consumer: (a) Any
article of tangible personal property purchased at retail, or acquired by
lease, gift, repossession, or bailment, or extracted or produced or
manufactured by the person so using the same, or otherwise furnished to a
person engaged in any business taxable under RCW 82.04.280 (2) or (7); or (b)
any canned software, regardless of the method of delivery, but excluding canned
software that is either provided free of charge or is provided for temporary
use in viewing information, or both.

(2) This tax shall
apply to the use of every service defined as a retail sale in RCW 82.04.050(3)(a)
and the use of every article of tangible personal property, including property
acquired at a casual or isolated sale, and including byproducts used by the
manufacturer thereof, except as hereinafter provided, irrespective of whether
the article or similar articles are manufactured or are available for purchase
within this state.

(3) Except as provided
in RCW 82.12.0252, payment by one purchaser or user of tangible personal
property or service of the tax imposed by chapter 82.08 or 82.12 RCW shall not
have the effect of exempting any other purchaser or user of the same property
or service from the taxes imposed by such chapters.

(4) The tax shall be
levied and collected in an amount equal to the value of the article used by the
taxpayer multiplied by the rates in effect for the retail sales tax
under RCW 82.08.020.

(5) The use tax
revenue collected on the rate provided in RCW 82.08.020(3) will be deposited in
the multimodal transportation account under RCW 47.66.070.

PART V - BOND AUTHORIZATION

NEW SECTION. Sec.
501. In order to provide funds
necessary for the location, design, right of way, and construction of selected
state and local highway improvements, there shall be issued and sold upon the
request of the transportation commission a total of three billion five hundred
million dollars of general obligation bonds of the state of Washington.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
502. Upon the request of the
transportation commission, as appropriate, the state finance committee shall
supervise and provide for the issuance, sale, and retirement of the bonds
authorized by RCW 46.68.090 in accordance with chapter 39.42 RCW. Bonds
authorized by this act shall be sold in the manner, at time or times, in amounts,
and at the price as the state finance committee shall determine. No bonds may
be offered for sale without prior legislative appropriation of the net proceeds
of the sale of the bonds.

The state finance
committee shall consider the issuance of short-term obligations in lieu of
long-term obligations for the purposes of more favorable interest rates, lower
total interest costs, and increased marketability and for the purpose of
retiring the bonds during the life of the project for which they were issued.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
503. The proceeds from the
sale of bonds authorized by section 501 of this act shall be deposited in the
motor vehicle fund. The proceeds shall be available only for the purposes
enumerated in section 501 of this act, for the payment of bond anticipation
notes, if any, and for the payment of bond issuance costs, including the costs
of underwriting.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
504. Bonds issued under the
authority of section 501 of this act shall distinctly state that they are a
general obligation of the state of Washington, shall pledge the full faith and
credit of the state to the payment of the principal thereof and the interest
thereon, and shall contain an unconditional promise to pay such principal and
interest as the same shall become due. The principal and interest on the bonds
shall be first payable from the proceeds of the state excise taxes on motor
vehicle and special fuels imposed by chapters 82.36 and 82.38 RCW. Proceeds of
these excise taxes are hereby pledged to the payment of any bonds and the
interest thereon issued under the authority of RCW 47.10.843 through 47.10.848,
and the legislature agrees to continue to impose these excise taxes on motor
vehicle and special fuels in amounts sufficient to pay, when due, the principal
and interest on all bonds issued under the authority of section 501 of this
act.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
505. Both principal and
interest on the bonds issued for the purposes of section 501 of this act shall
be payable from the highway bond retirement fund. The state finance committee
may provide that a special account be created in the fund to facilitate payment
of the principal and interest. The state finance committee shall, on or before
June 30th of each year, certify to the state treasurer the amount required for
principal and interest on the bonds in accordance with the bond proceedings.
The state treasurer shall withdraw revenues from the motor vehicle fund and
deposit in the highway bond retirement fund, or a special account in the fund,
such amounts, and at such times, as are required by the bond proceedings.

Any funds required for
bond retirement or interest on the bonds authorized by section 501 of this act
shall be taken from that portion of the motor vehicle fund that results from
the imposition of excise taxes on motor vehicle and special fuels and which is,
or may be, appropriated to the department of transportation for state highway
purposes. Funds required shall never constitute a charge against any other
allocations of motor vehicle fuel and special fuel tax revenues to the state,
counties, cities, and towns unless the amount arising from excise taxes on
motor vehicle and special fuels distributed to the state in the motor vehicle
fund proves insufficient to meet the requirements for bond retirement or
interest on any such bonds.

Any payments for bond
retirement or interest on the bonds taken from other revenues from the motor
vehicle fuel or special fuel taxes that are distributable to the state,
counties, cities, and towns shall be repaid from the first revenues from the
motor vehicle fuel or special fuel taxes distributed to the motor vehicle fund
not required for bond retirement or interest on the bonds.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
506. Bonds issued under the
authority of section 501 of this act and this section and any other general
obligation bonds of the state of Washington that have been or that may be
authorized and that pledge motor vehicle and special fuels excise taxes for the
payment of principal and interest thereon shall be an equal charge against the
revenues from such motor vehicle and special fuels excise taxes.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
507. For the purpose of
providing funds for the planning, design, construction, reconstruction, and
other necessary costs for transportation projects, including rail and
passenger-only ferry projects, the state finance committee is authorized to
issue general obligation bonds of the state of Washington in the sum of two
hundred fifty million dollars, or as much thereof as may be required, to
finance these projects and all costs incidental thereto. Bonds authorized in
this section may be sold at such price as the state finance committee shall
determine. No bonds authorized in this section may be offered for sale without
prior legislative appropriation of the net proceeds of the sale of the bonds.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
508. The proceeds of the sale
of the bonds authorized in section 507 of this act must be deposited in the
multimodal transportation account and must be used exclusively for the purposes
specified in section 507 of this act and for the payment of expenses incurred
in the issuance and sale of the bonds.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
509. (1) The nondebt-limit
reimbursable bond retirement account must be used for the payment of the
principal and interest on the bonds authorized in section 507 of this act.

(2)(a) The state
finance committee must, on or before June 30th of each year, certify to the
state treasurer the amount needed in the ensuing twelve months to meet the bond
retirement and interest requirements on the bonds authorized in section 507 of
this act.

(b) On or before the
date on which any interest or principal and interest is due, the state
treasurer shall transfer from the multimodal transportation account for deposit
into the nondebt-limit reimbursable bond retirement account the amount computed
in (a) of this subsection for bonds issued for the purposes of section 507 of
this act.

(3) If the multimodal
transportation account has insufficient revenues to pay the principal and
interest computed in subsection (2)(a) of this section, then the debt-limit
reimbursable bond retirement account must be used for the payment of the
principal and interest on the bonds authorized in section 507 of this act from
any additional means provided by the legislature.

(4) If at any time the
multimodal transportation account has insufficient revenues to repay the bonds,
the legislature may provide additional means for the payment of the bonds.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
510. (1) Bonds issued under
section 507 of this act must state that they are a general obligation of the
state of Washington, must pledge the full faith and credit of the state to the
payment of the principal and interest, and must contain an unconditional
promise to pay the principal and interest as it becomes due.

(2) The owner and
holder of each of the bonds or the trustee for the owner and holder of any of
the bonds may by mandamus or other appropriate proceeding require the transfer
and payment of funds as directed in this section.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
511. The legislature may
provide additional means for raising moneys for the payment of the principal
and interest on the bonds authorized in section 507 of this act, and sections
509 and 510 of this act are not deemed to provide an exclusive method for their
payment.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
512. The bonds authorized in
section 507 of this act are a legal investment for all state funds or funds
under state control and for all funds of any other public body.

Sec. 513. RCW 39.42.060 and 2001
2nd sp.s. c 9 s 18 are each amended to read as follows:

No bonds, notes, or
other evidences of indebtedness for borrowed money shall be issued by the state
which will cause the aggregate debt contracted by the state to exceed that
amount for which payments of principal and interest in any fiscal year would
require the state to expend more than seven percent of the arithmetic mean of
its general state revenues, as defined in section 1(c) of Article VIII of the
Washington state Constitution for the three immediately preceding fiscal years
as certified by the treasurer in accordance with RCW 39.42.070. It shall be
the duty of the state finance committee to compute annually the amount required
to pay principal of and interest on outstanding debt. In making such
computation, the state finance committee shall include all borrowed money
represented by bonds, notes, or other evidences of indebtedness which are
secured by the full faith and credit of the state or are required to be paid,
directly or indirectly, from general state revenues and which are incurred by
the state, any department, authority, public corporation or quasi public
corporation of the state, any state university or college, or any other public
agency created by the state but not by counties, cities, towns, school
districts, or other municipal corporations, and shall include debt incurred
pursuant to section 3 of Article VIII of the Washington state Constitution, but
shall exclude the following:

(1) Obligations for the
payment of current expenses of state government;

(2) Indebtedness
incurred pursuant to RCW 39.42.080 or 39.42.090;

(3) Principal of and
interest on bond anticipation notes;

(4) Any indebtedness
which has been refunded;

(5) Financing contracts
entered into under chapter 39.94 RCW;

(6) Indebtedness
authorized or incurred before July 1, 1993, pursuant to statute which requires
that the state treasury be reimbursed, in the amount of the principal of and
the interest on such indebtedness, from money other than general state revenues
or from the special excise tax imposed pursuant to chapter 67.40 RCW;

(7) Indebtedness
authorized and incurred after July 1, 1993, pursuant to statute that requires
that the state treasury be reimbursed, in the amount of the principal of and
the interest on such indebtedness, from (a) moneys outside the state treasury,
except higher education operating fees, (b) higher education building fees, (c)
indirect costs recovered from federal grants and contracts, and (d) fees and
charges associated with hospitals operated or managed by institutions of higher
education;

(8) Any agreement,
promissory note, or other instrument entered into by the state finance
committee under RCW 39.42.030 in connection with its acquisition of bond insurance,
letters of credit, or other credit support instruments for the purpose of
guaranteeing the payment or enhancing the marketability, or both, of any state
bonds, notes, or other evidence of indebtedness;

(9) Indebtedness
incurred for the purposes identified in RCW 43.99N.020;

(10) Indebtedness
incurred for the purposes of the school district bond guaranty established by
chapter 39.98 RCW;

(11) Indebtedness
incurred for the purposes of replacing the waterproof membrane over the east
plaza garage and revising related landscaping construction pursuant to RCW
43.99Q.070; ((and))

(12) Indebtedness
incurred for the purposes of the state legislative building rehabilitation, to
the extent that principal and interest payments of such indebtedness are paid
from the capitol building construction account pursuant to RCW 43.99Q.140(2)(b);
and

(13) Indebtedness
incurred for the purposes of financing projects under section 507 of this act.

To the extent necessary
because of the constitutional or statutory debt limitation, priorities with
respect to the issuance or guaranteeing of bonds, notes, or other evidences of
indebtedness by the state shall be determined by the state finance committee.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
514. Sections 501 through 512
of this act are each added to chapter 47.10 RCW.

PART VI - REFERENDUM

NEW SECTION. Sec.
601. (1) The secretary of
state shall submit this act, except for sections 310, 311, and 312, to the
people for their adoption and ratification, or rejection, at a special election
to be held in this state on or before June 20, 2002, in accordance with Article
II, section 1 of the state Constitution and the laws adopted to facilitate its
operation. The special election shall be limited to submission of this act to
the people.

(2) If the people
ratify this act, excluding sections 310, 311, and 312, revenues generated shall
be spent as detailed in House Bill No. . . . ., the 2001-03
state supplemental transportation budget. The primary emphasis of revenues
raised shall be improving transportation safety, reducing congestion, and
improving the movement of freight and goods. The legislature recognizes that
the projects detailed in House Bill No. . . . . are based on
assumptions that are beyond the legislature's control, such as availability of
federal funds, interest rates, required public approval for certain projects,
etc., and furthermore, that current laws authorize the state transportation
commission to make necessary adjustments to the proposed projects as unforeseen
circumstances may require. If additional funding for the projects contained in
House Bill No. . . . . becomes available, the legislature urges
the acceleration of project construction wherever possible.

(3) The attorney
general shall prepare the explanatory statement required by RCW 29.81.250 and
transmit that statement regarding the referendum to the secretary of state no
later than the last Monday of April before the special election.

(4) The secretary of
state shall prepare and distribute a voters' pamphlet addressing this
referendum measure following the procedures and requirements of chapter 29.81
RCW, except that the secretary of state may establish different deadlines for
the appointment of committees to draft arguments for and against the
referendum, for submitting arguments for and against the referendum, and for
submitting rebuttal statements of arguments for and against the referendum.

(5) A county auditor
may conduct the voting at this special election in all precincts of the county
by mail using the procedures set forth in chapter 29.36 RCW.

(6) Notwithstanding the
provisions of RCW 29.62.020, the county canvassing board in each county shall
canvass and certify the votes cast at this special election in that county to
the secretary of state no later than the seventh day following the election.
Notwithstanding the provisions of RCW 29.62.120, the secretary of state shall
canvass and certify the returns from the counties no later than the ninth day
following the special election.

(7) The secretary of
state shall reimburse each county for the cost of conducting the special
election in that county in the same manner as state primary and general
election costs are reimbursed under RCW 29.13.047 (1) and (3).

NEW SECTION. Sec.
602. Part headings used in
this act are not any part of the law.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
603. If Substitute House Bill
No. 2969 is not ratified by the voters by June 20, 2002, sections 310, 311, and
312 of this act are null and void.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
604. Sections 201, 202, 310,
311, 312, and 401 of this act take effect October 1, 2002.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 605. Section 601 of this act
is necessary for the immediate preservation of the public peace, health, or
safety, or support of the state government and its existing public
institutions, and takes effect immediately.

---
END ---