BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF
WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec.
1. A new section is added
to chapter 41.06 RCW to read as follows:

(1) No exclusive
bargaining representative certified to represent the employees of a bargaining
unit shall directly or indirectly pay or use, or offer, consent, or agree to
pay or use any money or thing of value for or in aid of any candidate for the
office of governor; nor for reimbursement or indemnification of any person for
money or property so used.

(2) Any
individual who violates any provision of this section, or who participates in,
aids, abets, advises, or consents to any such violation, or who solicits or
knowingly receives any money or thing of value in violation of this section,
shall be guilty of a gross misdemeanor and is liable to the exclusive
bargaining representative for the amount so contributed or received.

--- END ---