BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF
WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec.
1. The legislature finds
that voter trust in government is vital to the representative form of
government and that governing bodies must govern in a manner that enhances that
public trust. The legislature further finds that failure to deliver on
activities pledged to the voters seriously erodes public confidence in our
institutions and that this trust can best be regained by ensuring that future
actions by public bodies will meet public expectations.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
2. A new section is added
to chapter 81.112 RCW to read as follows:

(1) A regional transit
authority that by January 1, 2002, has been authorized to impose taxes to
support implementation of a plan within its service area is governed by this
section.

(2) The authority shall
prepare a report that will address, but not be limited to: Project delivery
schedules and service implementation outlined in the plan approved by voters;
projected future revenue and expenditures over the life of the plan; the budget
forecast over the life of the plan; and project delivery and service start-up
dates.

(3) The authority shall
submit its report to the governor, the transportation committees of the state
legislature, and the county councils for each county in which the authority is
located. After receipt of the plan, the legislative transportation committee
shall as quickly as practicable evaluate the report for content and accuracy
and hold at least one public hearing on the report. After evaluating the
report and conducting the public hearing or hearings, the committee shall make
a finding as to whether the report and projected project and service delivery
schedule and financial plan is attainable. A resolution adopted by the
committee finding that the report is acceptable and accurate constitutes
acceptance of the report.

(4) Until the report is
accepted by the legislative transportation committee, a regional transit
authority shall immediately cease and desist from entering into new contracts
for purchase of right of way or construction of facilities for any light rail
system development that is part of the plan adopted by the voters.

Sec. 3. RCW 81.112.070 and 1992
c 101 s 7 are each amended to read as follows:

Subject to the
limitations of section 2 of this act, in addition to the powers
specifically granted by this chapter an authority shall have all powers
necessary to implement a high capacity transportation system and to develop
revenues for system support. An authority may contract with the United States
or any agency thereof, any state or agency thereof, any public transportation
benefit area, any county, county transportation authority, city, metropolitan
municipal corporation, special district, or governmental agency, within or
without the state, and any private person, firm, or corporation for: (1) The
purpose of receiving gifts or grants or securing loans or advances for
preliminary planning and feasibility studies; (2) the design, construction, or
operation of high capacity transportation system facilities; or (3) the
provision or receipt of services, facilities, or property rights to provide
revenues for the system. An authority shall have the power to contract
pursuant to RCW 39.33.050. In addition, an authority may contract with any
governmental agency or with any private person, firm, or corporation for the
use by either contracting party of all or any part of the facilities,
structures, lands, interests in lands, air rights over lands and rights of way
of all kinds which are owned, leased, or held by the other party and for the
purpose of planning, constructing, or operating any facility or performing any
service that the authority may be authorized to operate or perform, on such
terms as may be agreed upon by the contracting parties. Before any contract
for the lease or operation of any authority facilities is let to any private
person, firm, or corporation, a general schedule of rental rates for equipment
with or without operators applicable to all private certificated carriers shall
be publicly posted, and for other facilities competitive bids shall first be
called upon such notice, bidder qualifications, and bid conditions as the board
shall determine. This shall allow use of negotiated procurements.

Sec. 4. RCW 81.112.080 and 1992
c 101 s 8 are each amended to read as follows:

Subject to the
limitations of section 2 of this act, an authority shall have the following
powers in addition to the general powers granted by this chapter:

(1) To carry out the
planning processes set forth in RCW 81.104.100;

(2) To acquire by
purchase, condemnation, gift, or grant and to lease, construct, add to,
improve, replace, repair, maintain, operate, and regulate the use of high
capacity transportation facilities and properties within authority boundaries
including surface, underground, or overhead railways, tramways, busways, buses,
bus sets, entrained and linked buses, ferries, or other means of local
transportation except taxis, and including escalators, moving sidewalks,
personal rapid transit systems or other people-moving systems, passenger
terminal and parking facilities and properties, and such other facilities and
properties as may be necessary for passenger, vehicular, and vessel access to
and from such people-moving systems, terminal and parking facilities and
properties, together with all lands, rights of way, property, equipment, and
accessories necessary for such high capacity transportation systems. When
developing specifications for high capacity transportation system operating
equipment, an authority shall take into account efforts to establish or sustain
a domestic manufacturing capacity for such equipment. The right of eminent
domain shall be exercised by an authority in the same manner and by the same
procedure as or may be provided by law for cities of the first class, except
insofar as such laws may be inconsistent with the provisions of this chapter.
Public transportation facilities and properties which are owned by any city,
county, county transportation authority, public transportation benefit area, or
metropolitan municipal corporation may be acquired or used by an authority only
with the consent of the agency owning such facilities. Such agencies are
hereby authorized to convey or lease such facilities to an authority or to
contract for their joint use on such terms as may be fixed by agreement between
the agency and the authority.

The facilities and
properties of an authority whose vehicles will operate primarily within the
rights of way of public streets, roads, or highways, may be acquired,
developed, and operated without the corridor and design hearings that are
required by RCW 35.58.273 for mass transit facilities operating on a separate
right of way;

(3) To dispose of any
real or personal property acquired in connection with any authority function
and that is no longer required for the purposes of the authority, in the same
manner as provided for cities of the first class. When an authority determines
that a facility or any part thereof that has been acquired from any public
agency without compensation is no longer required for authority purposes, but
is required by the agency from which it was acquired, the authority shall by
resolution transfer it to such agency;

(4) To fix rates,
tolls, fares, and charges for the use of such facilities and to establish
various routes and classes of service. Fares or charges may be adjusted or
eliminated for any distinguishable class of users.

Sec. 5. RCW 81.112.030 and 1994
c 44 s 1 are each amended to read as follows:

Two or more contiguous
counties each having a population of four hundred thousand persons or more may
establish a regional transit authority to develop and operate a high capacity
transportation system as defined in chapter 81.104 RCW.

The authority shall be
formed in the following manner:

(1) The joint regional
policy committee created pursuant to RCW 81.104.040 shall adopt a system and
financing plan, including the definition of the service area. This action shall
be completed by September 1, 1992, contingent upon satisfactory completion of
the planning process defined in RCW 81.104.100. The final system plan shall be
adopted no later than June 30, 1993. In addition to the requirements of RCW
81.104.100, the plan for the proposed system shall provide explicitly for a
minimum portion of new tax revenues to be allocated to local transit agencies
for interim express services. Upon adoption the joint regional policy
committee shall immediately transmit the plan to the county legislative
authorities within the adopted service area.

(2) The legislative
authorities of the counties within the service area shall decide by resolution
whether to participate in the authority. This action shall be completed within
forty-five days following receipt of the adopted plan or by August 13, 1993,
whichever comes first.

(3) Each county that
chooses to participate in the authority shall appoint its initial board
members as set forth in RCW 81.112.040 and shall submit its list of members to
the secretary of the Washington state department of transportation. These
actions must be completed within thirty days following each county's decision
to participate in the authority.

(4) The secretary shall
call the first meeting of the authority, to be held within thirty days
following receipt of the appointments. At its first meeting, the authority
shall elect officers and provide for the adoption of rules and other operating
procedures.

(5) The authority is
formally constituted at its first meeting and the board shall begin taking
steps toward implementation of the system and financing plan adopted by the
joint regional policy committee. If the joint regional policy committee fails
to adopt a plan by June 30, 1993, the authority shall proceed to do so based on
the work completed by that date by the joint regional policy committee. Upon
formation of the authority, the joint regional policy committee shall cease to
exist. The authority may make minor modifications to the plan as deemed necessary
and shall at a minimum review local transit agencies' plans to ensure feeder
service/high capacity transit service integration, ensure fare integration, and
ensure avoidance of parallel competitive services. The authority shall also
conduct a minimum thirty-day public comment period.

(6) If the authority
determines that major modifications to the plan are necessary before the
initial ballot proposition is submitted to the voters, the authority may make
those modifications with a favorable vote of two-thirds of the entire
membership. Any such modification shall be subject to the review process set
forth in RCW 81.104.110. The modified plan shall be transmitted to the
legislative authorities of the participating counties. The legislative authorities
shall have forty-five days following receipt to act by motion or ordinance to
confirm or rescind their continued participation in the authority.

(7) If any county opts
to not participate in the authority, but two or more contiguous counties do
choose to continue to participate, the authority's board shall be revised
accordingly. The authority shall, within forty-five days, redefine the system
and financing plan to reflect elimination of one or more counties, and submit
the redefined plan to the legislative authorities of the remaining counties for
their decision as to whether to continue to participate. This action shall be
completed within forty-five days following receipt of the redefined plan.

(8) The authority shall
place on the ballot within two years of the authority's formation, a single
ballot proposition to authorize the imposition of taxes to support the
implementation of an appropriate phase of the plan within its service area. In
addition to the system plan requirements contained in RCW 81.104.100(2)(d), the
system plan approved by the authority's board before the submittal of a
proposition to the voters shall contain an equity element which:

(a) Identifies revenues
anticipated to be generated by corridor and by county within the authority's
boundaries;

(b) Identifies the
phasing of construction and operation of high capacity system facilities,
services, and benefits in each corridor. Phasing decisions should give
priority to jurisdictions which have adopted transit-supportive land use plans;
and

(c) Identifies the
degree to which revenues generated within each county will benefit the
residents of that county, and identifies when such benefits will accrue.

A simple majority of
those voting within the boundaries of the authority is required for approval.
If the vote is affirmative, the authority shall begin implementation of the
projects identified in the proposition. However, the authority may not submit
any authorizing proposition for voter-approved taxes prior to July 1, 1993; nor
may the authority issue bonds or form any local improvement district prior to
July 1, 1993.

(9) If the vote on a
proposition fails, the board may redefine the proposition, make changes to the
authority boundaries, and make corresponding changes to the composition of the
board. If the composition of the board is changed, the participating counties
shall revise the membership of the board accordingly. The board may then
submit the revised proposition or a different proposition to the voters. No
single proposition may be submitted to the voters more than twice. The
authority may place additional propositions on the ballot to impose taxes to
support additional phases of plan implementation.

If the
authority is unable to achieve a positive vote on a proposition within two
years from the date of the first election on a proposition, the board may, by
resolution, reconstitute the authority as a single-county body. With a
two-thirds vote of the entire membership of the voting members, the board may
also dissolve the authority.

Sec. 6. RCW 81.112.040 and 1994
c 109 s 1 are each amended to read as follows:

(1)(a) The
regional transit authority shall be governed by a board ((consisting of
representatives appointed by the county executive and confirmed by the council
or other legislative authority of each member county. Membership shall be
based on population from that portion of each county which lies within the
service area. Board members shall be appointed initially on the basis of one
for each one hundred forty-five thousand population within the county. Such
appointments shall be made following consultation with city and town
jurisdictions within the service area. In addition, the secretary of
transportation or the secretary's designee shall serve as a member of the board
and may have voting status with approval of a majority of the other members of
the board. Only board members, not including alternates or designees, may cast
votes.

Each member of the
board, except the secretary of transportation or the secretary's designee,
shall be:

(a) An elected
official who serves on the legislative authority of a city or as mayor of a
city within the boundaries of the authority;

(b) On the
legislative authority of the county, if fifty percent of the population of the
legislative official's district is within the authority boundaries; or

(c) A county
executive from a member county within the authority boundaries.

When making appointments,
each county executive shall ensure that representation on the board includes an
elected city official representing the largest city in each county and assures
proportional representation from other cities, and representation from
unincorporated areas of each county within the service area. At least one-half
of all appointees from each county shall serve on the governing authority of a
public transportation system.

Members appointed
from each county shall serve staggered four-year terms. Vacancies shall be
filled by appointment for the remainder of the unexpired term of the position
being vacated.

The governing board
shall be reconstituted, with regard to the number of representatives from each
county, on a population basis, using the official office of financial
management population estimates, five years after its initial formation and, at
minimum, in the year following each official federal census. The board
membership may be reduced, maintained, or expanded to reflect population
changes but under no circumstances may the board membership exceed twenty-five)) of seven elected members, nominated and
elected on a nonpartisan basis.

(b) Nomination will
be by the voters of a prospective member's district in a primary election, but
election will be by all voters of the authority at a general election. Before
the initial election of board members, and in the year after the federal
decennial census, the appropriate county legislative authorities, acting
collectively, shall (i) define the boundaries of each member district so that
all districts have populations as near equal as practicable, and (ii) determine
board member part-time salaries.

(c) At the initial
election, four members will be elected for terms of four years and three
members will be elected for two-year terms. Thereafter, each member will be
elected for a term of four years and shall hold office until a successor is
elected and qualified.

(d) A vacancy in the
office of a board member occurs as provided in chapter 42.12 RCW or by nonattendance
at meetings of the board for a period of sixty days unless excused by a
majority of the board. Vacancies will be filled as provided in chapter 42.12
RCW.

(e) The initial
nomination and election of board members under this section will take place in
2002 at the times provided for other elected officials, and the terms of the
members elected starts January 1, 2003.

(f) The state
election laws contained in Title 29 RCW apply to elections held under this
section.

(g) The election
officials of the county or counties in which the district is located shall
conduct the election in accordance with the election laws of the state. Board
districts will be used as follows: (i) Only a registered voter who resides in
a district may be a candidate for, or serve as, a board member of the board
district; and (ii) only voters of a board district may vote at a primary to
nominate candidates.

(h) Vacancies will
be filled by appointment by the legislative authority of the county in which
the board district is primarily located.

(2) Major decisions of
the authority ((shall)) require a favorable vote of two-thirds of the
entire membership of the voting members. "Major decisions" include
at least the following: System plan adoption and amendment; system phasing
decisions; annual budget adoption; authorization of annexations; modification
of board composition; and executive director employment.

(3) Each member of the
board is eligible to be reimbursed for travel expenses in accordance with RCW
43.03.050 and 43.03.060 ((and to receive compensation as provided in RCW
43.03.250)).

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 7. Sections 1 through 4 of
this act are necessary for the immediate preservation of the public peace,
health, or safety, or support of the state government and its existing public
institutions, and take effect immediately.

---
END ---