BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF
WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1. 2002 c 5 s 205
(uncodified) is amended to read as follows:

Sections 201 through
204 of this act and RCW 41.06.380(2) are null and void if new transportation
revenues do not become law by January 1, 2003. ((Sections 201 through 204
of this act and RCW 41.06.380(2) are effective only for the period consistent
with the new transportation revenues, after which time these provisions will
expire.))

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 2. This act is necessary for
the immediate preservation of the public peace, health, or safety, or support
of the state government and its existing public institutions, and takes effect
immediately.

---
END ---