BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF
WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1. RCW 36.89.080 and 1998 c
74 s 1 are each amended to read as follows:

Any county
legislative authority may provide by resolution for revenues by fixing rates
and charges for the furnishing of service to those served or receiving benefits
or to be served or to receive benefits from any storm water control facility or
contributing to an increase of surface water runoff. In fixing rates and
charges, the county legislative authority may in its discretion consider: (1)
Services furnished or to be furnished; (2) benefits received or to be received;
(3) the character and use of land or its water runoff characteristics; (4) the
nonprofit public benefit status, as defined in RCW 24.03.490, of the land user;
(5) income level of persons served or provided benefits under this chapter,
including senior citizens and disabled persons; or (6) any other matters which
present a reasonable difference as a ground for distinction. The service
charges and rates collected shall be deposited in a special fund or funds in
the county treasury to be used only for the purpose of paying all or any part
of the cost and expense of maintaining and operating storm water control
facilities, all or any part of the cost and expense of planning, designing,
establishing, acquiring, developing, constructing and improving any of such
facilities, or to pay or secure the payment of all or any portion of any issue
of general obligation or revenue bonds issued for such purpose. Rates and
charges must take into consideration and be based on impacts or lack of impacts
the property served has on receiving waters and storm water systems. Other
factors such as impacts to water quality, extent of capital and operational
best management practices, natural or constructed water infiltration by
property served, and surrounding properties absorption characteristics, shall
be taken into consideration when assessing surface water management fees.
Rates and charges shall not apply to lands taxed as forest land under chapter
84.33 RCW or as timber land under chapter 84.34 RCW. An administrative process
must be provided for property owners and their representatives to appeal rates
and fees assessed served property. Property tax and surface water management
fees may appear on the same collection statement, if surface water fees and
taxes are clearly defined and payable separately. This section does not
require counties to change the timing of payment of surface water fees.

--- END ---