BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF
WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec.
1. The legislature finds
that the primary purpose of the salmon recovery office was the development of
the statewide salmon recovery strategy for submittal to the appropriate federal
agencies. The legislature further finds that since the development and submittal
of this strategy has been accomplished, the remaining tasks of the salmon
recovery office can be accomplished through existing state agencies. The
legislature believes that by relying upon existing state agencies to accomplish
salmon recovery, there will be less duplication of effort within the executive
branch and a corresponding savings of resources.

The legislature also
finds that the fish and wildlife commission is completely dependent upon the
department of fish and wildlife for staff support. This dependence upon the
department for staffing hampers the commission's ability to independently
oversee activities of the department, as well as to meet its other statutory
responsibilities. The lack of independent staff also impacts how the general
public perceives the effectiveness of the commission. Therefore, it is the
intent of the legislature to direct some of the savings realized from the
repeal of the salmon recovery office towards the fish and wildlife commission
in order to provide them with independent staff support.

Finally, the
legislature recognizes that the general public holds the governor, as the
highest elected official in the state, accountable for decisions that affect
fish and wildlife resources. The governor, however, does not have the
authority to hire and fire the director of the department of fish and
wildlife. The legislature believes that the governor should have this
authority to choose the director of the department because of the importance
that decisions made by the director have upon fish and wildlife resources and
upon communities.

Sec. 2. RCW 77.85.005 and 1999
sp.s. c 13 s 1 are each amended to read as follows:

The legislature finds
that repeated attempts to improve salmonid fish runs throughout the state of
Washington have failed to avert listings of salmon and steelhead runs as
threatened or endangered under the federal endangered species act (16 U.S.C.
Sec. 1531 et seq.). These listings threaten the sport, commercial, and tribal
fishing industries as well as the economic well-being and vitality of vast
areas of the state. It is the intent of the legislature to begin activities
required for the recovery of salmon stocks as soon as possible, although the
legislature understands that successful recovery efforts may not be realized
for many years because of the life cycle of salmon and the complex array of
natural and human-caused problems they face.

The legislature finds
that it is in the interest of the citizens of the state of Washington for the
state to retain primary responsibility for managing the natural resources of
the state, rather than abdicate those responsibilities to the federal
government, and that the state may best accomplish this objective by
integrating local and regional recovery activities into a statewide plan that
can make the most effective use of provisions of federal laws allowing for a
state lead in salmon recovery. The legislature also finds that a statewide
salmon recovery plan must be developed and implemented through an active public
involvement process in order to ensure public participation in, and support
for, salmon recovery. The legislature also finds that there is a substantial
link between the provisions of the federal endangered species act and the
federal clean water act (33 U.S.C. Sec. 1251 et seq.). The legislature further
finds that habitat restoration is a vital component of salmon recovery
efforts. Therefore, it is the intent of the legislature to specifically
address salmon habitat restoration in a coordinated manner and to develop a
structure that allows for the coordinated delivery of federal, state, and local
assistance to communities for habitat projects that will assist in the recovery
and enhancement of salmon stocks.

The legislature also
finds that credible scientific review and oversight is essential for any salmon
recovery effort to be successful.

The legislature further
finds that it is important to monitor the overall health of the salmon resource
to determine if recovery efforts are providing expected returns. It is
important to monitor salmon habitat projects and salmon recovery activities to
determine their effectiveness in order to secure federal acceptance of the
state's approach to salmon recovery. Adaptive management cannot exist without
monitoring. For these reasons, the legislature believes that a coordinated and
integrated monitoring process should be developed.

The legislature
therefore finds that a coordinated framework for responding to the salmon
crisis is needed immediately. To that end, ((the salmon recovery office
should be created within the governor's office to provide overall coordination
of the state's response;)) an independent science panel is needed to
provide scientific review and oversight; a coordinated state funding process
should be established through a salmon recovery funding board; the appropriate
local or tribal government should provide local leadership in identifying and sequencing
habitat projects to be funded by state agencies; habitat projects should be
implemented without delay; and a strong locally based effort to restore salmon
habitat should be established by providing a framework to allow citizen
volunteers to work effectively.

Sec. 3. RCW 77.04.055 and 2000 c
107 s 204 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) In establishing
policies to preserve, protect, and perpetuate wildlife, fish, and wildlife and
fish habitat, the commission shall meet annually with the governor to:

(a) Review and
prescribe basic goals and objectives related to those policies; and

(b) Review the
performance of the department in implementing fish and wildlife policies.

The commission shall
maximize fishing, hunting, and outdoor recreational opportunities compatible
with healthy and diverse fish and wildlife populations.

(2) The commission
shall establish hunting, trapping, and fishing seasons and prescribe the time,
place, manner, and methods that may be used to harvest or enjoy game fish and
wildlife.

(3) The commission
shall establish provisions regulating food fish and shellfish as provided in
RCW 77.12.047.

(4) The commission
shall have final approval authority for tribal, interstate, international, and
any other department agreements relating to fish and wildlife.

(5) The commission
shall adopt rules to implement the state's fish and wildlife laws.

(6) The commission
shall ((have final approval authority for)) provide the department
with its input regarding the department's budget proposals.

(7) The commission
shall select its own staff ((and shall appoint the director of the
department. The director and commission staff shall)) who serve at
the pleasure of the commission.

Sec. 4. RCW 77.04.080 and 2000 c
107 s 205 are each amended to read as follows:

Persons eligible for
appointment as director shall have practical knowledge of the habits and
distribution of fish and wildlife. The director shall supervise the administration
and operation of the department and perform the duties prescribed by law and
delegated by the commission. The director shall carry out the basic goals and
objectives prescribed under RCW 77.04.055. The director may appoint and employ
necessary personnel. The director may delegate, in writing, to department
personnel the duties and powers necessary for efficient operation and
administration of the department.

Only persons having
general knowledge of the fisheries and wildlife resources and of the commercial
and recreational fishing industry in this state are eligible for appointment as
director. The director shall not have a financial interest in the fishing
industry or a directly related industry. The director is appointed by the
governor. The director shall receive the salary fixed by the governor
under RCW 43.03.040.

The director is the ex
officio secretary of the commission and shall attend its meetings and keep a
record of its business.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
5. RCW 77.85.150 (Statewide salmon recovery
strategy--Prospective application) is decodified.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 6. RCW 77.85.030 (Governor's salmon
recovery office--Creation--Purpose) and 2000 c 107 s 93, 1999 sp.s. c 13 s 8,
& 1998 c 246 s 5 are each repealed.

---
END ---