BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF
WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec.
1. The legislature
recognizes that because of the serious revenue shortfall for the immediate
future that substantial cuts in state services must be made. Furthermore, the
legislature finds that efficiencies and economies in state government can be
achieved by merging the operations of agencies with like functions. The state
library and academic, agency, and other public libraries provide similar
services to consumers. In addition, with the increased availability of
digitized information for employees of state agencies, the legislature, and
academia, consumers' use of the state library has declined over the years. The
decline in use of the library has led the legislature to conclude that the
library should be eliminated.

It is, therefore, the
intent of the legislature to transfer the most important responsibilities of
the state library to other public libraries, to distribute its collection of
books, documents, and other printed materials to public agencies and public
libraries, and to abolish the state library.

PART
1

STATE LIBRARY ABOLISHED

NEW SECTION. Sec.
101. (1) The state library is
hereby abolished effective October 1, 2002, and its powers, duties, and
functions are either transferred to other public agencies as enumerated in this
act or eliminated.

(2)(a) All reports,
documents, surveys, books, records, files, papers, or written material in the
possession of the state library shall be delivered to the custody of the agency
assuming responsibility for the function transferred. All cabinets, furniture,
office equipment, motor vehicles, and other tangible property employed by the
state library shall be made available to the agency assuming responsibility for
the function transferred. All funds, credits, or other assets held by the
state library shall be assigned to the agency assuming responsibility for the
function transferred.

(b) Any appropriations
made to the state library shall, on October 31, 2002, be transferred and
credited to the agency assuming responsibility for the function transferred.

(c) If any question
arises as to the transfer of any personnel, funds, books, documents, records,
papers, files, equipment, or other tangible property used or held in the
exercise of the powers and the performance of the duties and functions
transferred, the director of financial management shall make a determination as
to the proper allocation and certify the same to the state agencies concerned.

(3) All rules and all
pending business before the state library shall be continued and acted upon by
the agency assuming responsibility for the function transferred. All existing
contracts and obligations shall remain in full force and shall be performed by
the agency assuming responsibility for the function transferred.

(4) The transfer of the
powers, duties, functions, and personnel of the state library does not affect
the validity of any act performed before October 31, 2002.

(5) If apportionments
of budgeted funds are required because of the transfers directed by this section,
the director of financial management shall certify the apportionments to the
agencies affected, the state auditor, and the state treasurer. Each of these
shall make the appropriate transfer and adjustments in funds and appropriation
accounts and equipment records in accordance with the certification.

(6) This section may
not be construed to alter any existing collective bargaining unit or the
provisions of any existing collective bargaining agreement until the agreement
has expired or until the bargaining unit has been modified. This section may
not be construed to alter any right of employees to bargain collectively.

PART
2

TRANSFER AND ELIMINATION OF
FUNCTIONS

NEW SECTION. Sec.
201. Effective October 31,
2002, all employees of the state library who are currently located in branch
libraries in state institutions or in an agency library under a contract the
state library has with a state agency before October 31, 2002, shall be transferred
to the jurisdiction of the state agency in which the branch or agency library
is located.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
202. (1) Responsibility for
the Washington talking book and braille library is transferred to the
department of community, trade, and economic development.

(2) Responsibility for
the Washington Room and other northwest collections including newspapers,
manuscripts, historic photographs, northwest history books, census data, maps,
published government documents, and other historical materials are transferred
to the state archivist.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
203. A new section is added
to chapter 28B.40 RCW to read as follows:

The secretary of state
is designated as the state's federal depository and as the regional depository
for Washington and Alaska.

Sec. 204. RCW 27.04.100 and 1990 c
68 s 1 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) In recognition of
prison overcrowding and the hazardous nature of employment in state
institutions and offices, the legislature hereby provides a supplementary
program to reimburse employees ((of the)) who are employed by a
state agency that maintains a library located within a state
institution, for some of their costs attributable to their being the
victims of offender or resident assaults. This program shall be limited to the
reimbursement provided in this section.

(2) An employee is only
entitled to receive the reimbursement provided in this section if the ((state
librarian, or the state librarian's)) secretary, or the secretary's
designee, finds that each of the following has occurred:

(a) An offender or
resident has assaulted the employee while the employee is performing the
employee's official duties and as a result ((thereof)), the
employee has sustained injuries which have required the employee to miss days
of work; and

(b) The assault cannot
be attributable to any extent to the employee's negligence, misconduct, or
failure to comply with any rules or conditions of employment.

(3) The reimbursement
authorized under this section shall be as follows:

(a) The employee's
accumulated sick leave days shall not be reduced for the workdays missed;

(b) For each workday
missed for which the employee is not eligible to receive compensation under
chapter 51.32 RCW, the employee shall receive full pay; and

(c) With respect to
workdays missed for which the employee will receive or has received compensation
under chapter 51.32 RCW, the employee shall be reimbursed in an amount which,
when added to that compensation, will result in the employee receiving full pay
for the workdays missed.

(4) Reimbursement under
this section may not last longer than three hundred sixty-five consecutive days
after the date of the injury.

(5) The employee shall
not be entitled to the reimbursement provided in subsection (3) of this section
for any workday for which the ((state librarian, or the state librarian's))
secretary, or the secretary's designee, finds that the employee has not
diligently pursued his or her compensation remedies under chapter 51.32 RCW.

(6) The reimbursement
shall only be made for absences which the ((state librarian, or the state
librarian's)) secretary, or the secretary's designee, believes are
justified.

(7) While the employee
is receiving reimbursement under this section, he or she shall continue to be
classified as a state employee and the reimbursement amount shall be considered
as salary or wages.

(8) All reimbursement
payments required to be made to employees under this section shall be made by
the state ((library)) agency by which they are employed. The
payments shall be considered as a salary or wage expense and shall be paid by
the state ((library)) agency in the same manner and from the same
appropriations as other salary and wage expenses of the state ((library))
agency.

(9) Should the
legislature revoke the reimbursement authorized under this section or repeal
this section, no affected employee is entitled thereafter to receive the
reimbursement as a matter of contractual right.

(10) For the purposes
of this section, "offender or resident" means: (a) Inmate as defined
in RCW 72.09.020, (b) offender as defined in RCW 9.94A.030, (c) any other
person in the custody of or subject to the jurisdiction of the department of
corrections, or (d) a resident of a state institution.

Sec. 205. RCW 27.12.180 and 1941 c
65 s 6 are each amended to read as follows:

Instead of establishing
or maintaining an independent library, the legislative body of any governmental
unit authorized to maintain a library shall have power to contract to receive
library service from an existing library, the board of trustees of which shall
have reciprocal power to contract to render the service with the consent of the
legislative body of its governmental unit. Such a contract shall require that
the existing library perform all the functions of a library within the
governmental unit wanting service. In like manner a legislative body may
contract for library service from a library not owned by a public corporation
but maintained for free public use((: PROVIDED, That such a library be
subject to inspection by the state librarian and be certified by him as
maintaining a proper standard)). Any school district may contract for
school library service from any existing library, such service to be paid for
from funds available to the school district for library purposes.

Sec. 206. RCW 27.12.260 and 1935 c
119 s 12 are each amended to read as follows:

At the close of each
year the board of trustees of every library shall make a report to the
legislative body of the governmental unit wherein the board serves, showing the
condition of their trust during the year, the sums of money received for the
library fund from taxes and other sources, the sums of money expended and the
purposes of the expenditures, the number of books and periodicals on hand, the
number added during the year, the number retired, the number loaned out, and
such other statistics and information and such suggestions as they deem of
public interest. ((A copy of this report shall be filed with the state
librarian.))

Sec. 207. RCW 27.12.320 and 1982 c
123 s 12 are each amended to read as follows:

A library established
or maintained under this chapter (except a regional or a rural county library
district library, an intercounty rural library district library, or an island
library district library) may be abolished only in pursuance of a vote of the
electors of the governmental unit in which the library is located, taken in the
manner prescribed in RCW 27.12.030 for a vote upon the establishment of a
library. If a library of a city or town be abolished, the books and other
printed or written matter belonging to it shall go to the library of the county
whereof the municipality is a part, if there be a county library((, but if
not, then to the state library. If a library of a county or region be
abolished, the books and other printed matter belonging to it shall go to the
state library. All other)). If there is no county library, all
library property, including books and documents, shall be disposed of as
the legislative body of the governmental unit shall direct.

After a rural county
library district, an island library district, or an intercounty rural library
district has been in operation for three or more years, it may be dissolved
pursuant to a majority vote of all of the qualified electors residing outside
of incorporated cities and towns voting upon a proposition for its dissolution,
at a general election, which proposition may be placed upon the ballot at any
such election whenever a petition by ten percent or more qualified voters
residing outside of incorporated cities or towns within a rural county library
district, an island library district, or an intercounty rural library district
requesting such dissolution shall be filed with the board of trustees of such
district not less than ninety days prior to the holding of any such election.
An island library district may also be dissolved pursuant to RCW 27.12.450.

If a rural county
library district is dissolved, ((the books and other printed matter
belonging to it shall go to the state library. All other)) all
library property, including books and other printed materials, shall be
disposed of as the legislative body of the governmental unit shall direct.
When an intercounty rural library district is dissolved, the books, funds and
other property thereof shall be divided among the participating counties in the
most equitable manner possible ((as determined by the state librarian, who
shall give consideration to)) considering such items as the original
source of property, the amount of funds raised from each county by the
district, and the ability of the counties to make further use of such property
or equipment for library purposes. ((Printed material which the state
librarian finds will not be used by any of the participating counties for
further library purposes shall be turned over to the state library.))

When an island library
district is dissolved pursuant to this section, the books ((and)),
other printed matter belonging to it ((shall go to the state library. All)),
and other library property shall be disposed of as the legislative body of
the governmental unit shall direct. When an island library district is
dissolved due to the establishment of a county library district, pursuant to
RCW 27.12.450, all property, assets, and liabilities of the preexisting island
library district within the area included in the county rural library district
shall pass to and be assumed by the county rural library district: PROVIDED,
That where within any county rural library district heretofore or hereafter
organized under the provisions of this chapter a preexisting island library
district has incurred a bonded indebtedness which was outstanding at the time
of the formation of the county rural library district, the preexisting island
library district shall retain its corporate existence insofar as is necessary
for the purpose until the bonded indebtedness outstanding against it on and
after the effective date of the formation has been paid in full: PROVIDED
FURTHER, That a special election may be called by the board of trustees of the
county rural library district, to be held at the next general or special
election held in the respective counties, for the purpose of affording the
voters residing within the area outside of the preexisting island library
district an opportunity to assume the obligation of the bonded indebtedness of
the preexisting island library district or the question may be submitted to the
voters as a separate proposition at the election on the proposal for the
formation of the county rural library district.

Sec. 208. RCW 27.12.360 and 1982 c
123 s 13 are each amended to read as follows:

Any city or town with a
population of one hundred thousand or less at the time of annexation may become
a part of any rural county library district, island library district, or
intercounty rural library district lying contiguous thereto by annexation in
the following manner: The inclusion of such a city or town may be initiated by
the adoption of an ordinance by the legislative authority thereof stating its
intent to join the library district and finding that the public interest will
be served thereby. Before adoption, the ordinance shall be submitted to the
library board of the city or town for its review and recommendations. ((If
no library board exists in the city or town, the state librarian shall be
notified of the proposed ordinance.)) If the board of trustees of the
library district concurs in the annexation, notification thereof shall be
transmitted to the legislative authority or authorities of the counties in
which the city or town is situated.

Sec. 209. RCW 27.18.010 and 1982 c
123 s 17 are each amended to read as follows:

As used in this
chapter, except where the context otherwise requires:

(1) "Compact"
means the interstate library compact.

(2) "Public
library agency", with reference to this state, means ((the state library
and)) any county or city library or any regional library, rural county
library district library, island library district library, or intercounty rural
library district library.

(((3) "State
library agency", with reference to this state, means the commissioners of
the state library.))

Sec. 210. RCW 27.18.030 and 1965
ex.s. c 93 s 3 are each amended to read as follows:

The ((state)) head
librarian of The Evergreen State College shall be the compact
administrator pursuant to Article X of the compact. ((The state librarian
shall appoint one or more deputy compact administrators.)) Every library
agreement made pursuant to Article VI of the compact shall, as a condition
precedent to its entry into force, be submitted to the ((state)) head
librarian of The Evergreen State College for his or her
recommendations.

Sec. 211. RCW 17.15.040 and 1997 c
357 s 5 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) The interagency
integrated pest management coordinating committee is created. The committee is
composed of the integrated pest management coordinator from each agency or
institution listed under RCW 17.15.020 and the representatives designated under
RCW 17.15.030. The coordinator from the department of agriculture shall serve
as chair of the committee.

(2) The interagency
integrated pest management coordinating committee shall share information among
the state agencies and institutions and facilitate interagency coordination.

(3) The interagency
integrated pest management coordinating committee shall meet at least two times
a year. All meetings of the committee must be open to the public. The
committee shall give public notice of each meeting.

(4) By November 30th of
each odd-numbered year up to and including November 30th, 2001, the department
of agriculture, with the advice of the interagency integrated pest management
coordinating committee, shall prepare a report on the progress of integrated
pest management programs. The report is to be made available through the ((state
library)) department of agriculture's web site and placed on the
legislative alert list.

Sec. 212. RCW 27.12.100 and 1965 c
63 s 1 are each amended to read as follows:

An intercounty rural
library district shall be established by joint action of two or more counties
proceeding by either of the following alternative methods:

(1) The boards of
county commissioners of any two or more counties shall adopt identical
resolutions proposing the formation of such a district to include all of the
areas outside of incorporated cities or towns in such counties as may be
designated in such resolutions. In lieu of such resolutions a petition of like
purport signed by ten percent of the registered voters residing outside of
incorporated cities or towns of a county, may be filed with the county auditor
thereof, and shall have the same effect as a resolution. The proposition for
the formation of the district as stated on the petition shall be prepared by
the ((attorney general)) prosecuting attorney's office upon
request of the ((state library commission)) legislative body of the
county or counties. Action to initiate the formation of such a district
shall become ineffective in any county if corresponding action is not completed
within one year thereafter by each other county included in such proposal. The
county auditor in each county shall check the validity of the signatures on the
petition and shall certify to the board of county commissioners the sufficiency
of the signatures. If each petition contains the signatures of ten percent of
the registered voters residing outside the incorporated cities and towns of the
county, each board of county commissioners shall pass a resolution calling an
election for the purpose of submitting the question to the voters and setting
the date of said election. When such action has been taken in each of the counties
involved, notification shall be made by each board of county commissioners to
the board of county commissioners of the county having the largest population
according to the last federal census, who shall give proper notification to
each county auditor. At the next general or special election held in the
respective counties there shall be submitted to the voters in the areas outside
of incorporated cities and towns a question as to whether an intercounty rural
library district shall be established as outlined in the resolutions or
petitions. Notice of said election shall be given the county auditor pursuant
to RCW 29.27.080. The county auditor shall provide for the printing of a
separate ballot and shall provide for the distribution of ballots to the
polling places pursuant to RCW 29.04.020. The county auditor shall instruct
the election boards in split precincts. The respective county canvassing
boards in each county to be included within the intercounty rural library
district shall canvass the votes and certify the results to the county auditor
pursuant to chapter 29.62 RCW; the result shall then be certified by each
county auditor to the county auditor of the county having the largest
population according to the last federal census. If a majority of the electors
voting on the proposition in each of the counties affected shall vote in favor
of such district it shall thereby become established, and the board of county
commissioners of the county having the largest population according to the last
federal census shall declare the intercounty rural library district
established. If two or more of the counties affected are in an existing
intercounty rural library district, then the electors in areas outside
incorporated cities and towns in those counties shall vote as a unit and the
electors in areas outside incorporated cities and towns in each of the other
affected counties shall vote as separate units. If a majority of the electors
voting on the proposition in the existing district and a majority of the voters
in any of the other affected counties shall vote in favor of an expanded
intercounty rural library district it shall thereby become established.

(2) The county
commissioners of two or more counties meeting in joint session attended by a
majority of the county commissioners of each county may, by majority vote of
those present, order the establishment of an intercounty rural library district
to include all of the area outside of incorporated cities and towns in as many
of the counties represented at such joint meeting as shall be determined by
resolution of such joint meeting. If two or more counties are in an existing
intercounty rural library district, then a majority vote of all of the
commissioners present from those counties voting as a unit, and a majority vote
of the commissioners present from any other county shall cause the joint
session to order the establishment of an expanded intercounty rural library
district. No county, however, shall be included in such district if a majority
of its county commissioners vote against its inclusion in such district.

Sec. 213. RCW 27.12.305 and 1972
ex.s. c 90 s 1 are each amended to read as follows:

Any public library((,
including the state library created pursuant to chapter 27.04 RCW, shall have))
has the authority to provide for the sale of library materials developed
by the library staff for its use but which are of value to others such as book
catalogs, books published by the library, indexes, films, slides, book lists,
and similar materials.

The ((library
commission,)) board of library trustees((,)) or other governing
authority charged with the direct control of a public library shall determine
the prices and quantities of materials to be prepared and offered for sale.
Prices shall be limited to the publishing and preparation costs, exclusive of
staff salaries and overhead. Any moneys received from the sales of such
materials shall be placed in the appropriate library fund.

Nothing in this section
shall be construed to authorize any library to charge any resident for a
library service nor to authorize any library to sell materials to a branch
library or library which is part of a depository library system when such
materials may be distributed free of cost to such library nor shall this
section be construed to prevent, curtail, or inhibit any free distribution
programs or exchange programs between libraries or between libraries and other
agencies.

Sec. 214. RCW 28A.410.240 and 2000
c 39 s 203 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) By December 1,
2003, and annually thereafter, the Washington professional educator standards
board shall prepare a report that includes the following information:

(a) The range of scores
on the basic skills assessment under RCW 28A.410.220(1) for persons who passed
the assessment and were admitted to a Washington preparation program; and

(b) The range of scores
on the subject assessments under RCW 28A.410.220(2) for persons who passed the
assessments and earned an endorsement.

(2) The information
under subsection (1) of this section shall be reported for the individual
public and private colleges and universities in Washington, as well as reported
on an aggregate basis. The report shall also include results disaggregated
demographically. The report shall include information on the number and
percentage of candidates exempted from assessments, demographic information on
candidates exempted, institutions attended and endorsements sought by exempted
candidates, and reasons for exclusion from the required assessments. The
report shall be made available ((through the state library,)) on the ((website))
web site of the office of superintendent of public instruction, and
placed on the legislative alert list.

Sec. 215. RCW 28A.650.015 and 1995
c 335 s 507 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) The superintendent
of public instruction, to the extent funds are appropriated, shall develop and
implement a Washington state K-12 education technology plan. The technology
plan shall be updated on at least a biennial basis, shall be developed to
coordinate and expand the use of education technology in the common schools of
the state. The plan shall be consistent with applicable provisions of chapter
43.105 RCW. The plan, at a minimum, shall address:

(a) The provision of
technical assistance to schools and school districts for the planning,
implementation, and training of staff in the use of technology in curricular
and administrative functions;

(b) The continued
development of a network to connect school districts, institutions of higher
learning, and other sources of on-line information; and

(c) Methods to
equitably increase the use of education technology by students and school
personnel throughout the state.

(2) The superintendent
of public instruction shall appoint an educational technology advisory
committee to assist in the development and implementation of the technology
plan in subsection (1) of this section. The committee shall include, but is
not limited to, persons representing: The state board of education, the
commission on student learning, the department of information services,
educational service districts, school directors, school administrators, school
principals, teachers, classified staff, higher education faculty, parents,
students, business, labor, scientists and mathematicians, the higher education
coordinating board, and the work force training and education
coordinating board((, and the state library)).

Sec. 216. RCW 35.17.170 and 1965 c
7 s 35.17.170 are each amended to read as follows:

The commission shall
each month print in pamphlet form a detailed itemized statement of all receipts
and expenses of the city and a summary of its proceedings during the preceding
month and furnish copies ((thereof)) to ((the state library,))
the city library, the newspapers of the city, and to persons who apply therefor
at the office of the city clerk. At the end of each year the commission shall
cause a complete examination of all the books and accounts of the city to be
made by competent accountants and shall publish the result of such examination
to be made in the manner above provided for publication of statements of
monthly expenditures.

Sec. 217. RCW 40.06.020 and 1977
ex.s. c 232 s 9 are each amended to read as follows:

((There is hereby
created as a division of the state library, and under the direction of the
state librarian, a state publications distribution center. The center shall
utilize the depository library system to permit citizens economical and
convenient access to state publications. To this end the state library
commission shall make such rules and regulations as may be deemed necessary to
carry out the provisions of this chapter)) Every state agency that
produces a state publication shall maintain a copy of the publication for use
by the public or state employees. An agency may comply with this section by
making the state publication available through its web site.

Sec. 218. RCW 40.06.050 and 1963 c
233 s 5 are each amended to read as follows:

((The center)) Each
state agency shall publish and distribute or place on its web site and
update regularly a list of available state publications, and may publish
and distribute such other descriptive printed matter as will facilitate the
distribution of state publications.

Sec. 219. RCW 40.07.030 and 1977
ex.s. c 232 s 3 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) Any annual,
biennial, or special report required to be made by any state officer, board,
agency, department, commissioner, regents, trustees, or institution to the
governor or to the legislature may be typewritten and a copy shall be filed
with the governor, or the governor's designee, and the legislature as the law
may require. ((An additional copy shall be filed with the state library as
a public record.))

(2) The director or the
director's designee may selectively review state publications in order to
determine if specific state publications are economically and effectively
contributing to the accomplishment of state agency program objectives. The
director or the director's designee shall provide general guidelines as to the
number of copies to be printed for use or distribution by the issuing agency
and any public or other distribution under chapter 40.06 RCW as now or
hereafter amended, or other applicable directives.

(3) No agency head
shall recommend a state publication for printing and distribution, other than
those required by law, unless the benefits from the publication and
distribution ((thereof)) to the citizens and taxpayers of this state
clearly exceed the costs of preparation, printing, and distribution.

(4) The director, after
consultation with affected agencies, shall prepare and publish guidelines for
use by state agencies in determining and evaluating the benefits and costs of
current and proposed state publications. All state agencies shall evaluate
each new state publication they propose and shall annually evaluate each
continuing state publication they produce in accordance with the guidelines
published by the director.

(5) The director shall,
after consultation with affected state agencies, also provide by general rules
and regulations for overall control of the quality of the printing of state
publications. Necessary publications are to be prepared and printed in the
most economic manner consistent with effectiveness and achievement of program
objectives.

Sec. 220. RCW 40.14.080 and 1983 c
3 s 84 are each amended to read as follows:

The provisions of this
chapter shall not be construed as repealing or modifying any other acts or
parts of acts authorizing the destruction of public records save for those
specifically named in section 9 ((of this act; nor shall this chapter affect
the provisions of chapter 40.07 RCW requiring the deposit of all state
publications in the state library)), chapter 246, Laws of 1957.

Sec. 221. RCW 40.14.100 and 1971
ex.s. c 102 s 2 are each amended to read as follows:

As used in RCW
40.14.010 and 40.14.100 through 40.14.180, unless the context requires
otherwise, "legislative records" shall be defined as correspondence,
amendments, reports, and minutes of meetings made by or submitted to
legislative committees or subcommittees and transcripts or other records of
hearings or supplementary written testimony or data thereof filed with
committees or subcommittees in connection with the exercise of legislative or
investigatory functions, but does not include the records of an official act of
the legislature kept by the secretary of state, bills and their copies,
published materials, digests, or multi-copied matter which are routinely
retained and otherwise available ((at the state library or)) in a public
repository, or reports or correspondence made or received by or in any way
under the personal control of the individual members of the legislature.

Sec. 222. RCW 40.14.180 and 1983 c
3 s 85 are each amended to read as follows:

The provisions of RCW
40.14.010 and 40.14.100 through 40.14.180 shall not be construed as repealing
or modifying any other acts or parts of acts authorizing the retention or
destruction of public records nor shall RCW 40.14.010 and 40.14.100 through
40.14.180 affect ((the provisions of chapter 40.07 RCW requiring the deposit
of all state publications in the state library nor shall it affect)) the
confidentiality of the bill drafting records of the code reviser's office.

Sec. 223. RCW 42.30.110 and 2001 c
216 s 1 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) Nothing contained
in this chapter may be construed to prevent a governing body from holding an
executive session during a regular or special meeting:

(a) To consider matters
affecting national security;

(b) To consider the
selection of a site or the acquisition of real estate by lease or purchase when
public knowledge regarding such consideration would cause a likelihood of
increased price;

(c) To consider the
minimum price at which real estate will be offered for sale or lease when
public knowledge regarding such consideration would cause a likelihood of
decreased price. However, final action selling or leasing public property
shall be taken in a meeting open to the public;

(d) To review
negotiations on the performance of publicly bid contracts when public knowledge
regarding such consideration would cause a likelihood of increased costs;

(e) To consider, in the
case of an export trading company, financial and commercial information
supplied by private persons to the export trading company;

(f) To receive and
evaluate complaints or charges brought against a public officer or employee.
However, upon the request of such officer or employee, a public hearing or a
meeting open to the public shall be conducted upon such complaint or charge;

(g) To evaluate the
qualifications of an applicant for public employment or to review the
performance of a public employee. However, subject to RCW 42.30.140(4),
discussion by a governing body of salaries, wages, and other conditions of
employment to be generally applied within the agency shall occur in a meeting
open to the public, and when a governing body elects to take final action
hiring, setting the salary of an individual employee or class of employees, or
discharging or disciplining an employee, that action shall be taken in a
meeting open to the public;

(h) To evaluate the
qualifications of a candidate for appointment to elective office. However, any
interview of such candidate and final action appointing a candidate to elective
office shall be in a meeting open to the public;

(i) To discuss with
legal counsel representing the agency matters relating to agency enforcement
actions, or to discuss with legal counsel representing the agency litigation or
potential litigation to which the agency, the governing body, or a member
acting in an official capacity is, or is likely to become, a party, when public
knowledge regarding the discussion is likely to result in an adverse legal or
financial consequence to the agency.

This subsection (1)(i)
does not permit a governing body to hold an executive session solely because an
attorney representing the agency is present. For purposes of this subsection
(1)(i), "potential litigation" means matters protected by RPC 1.6 or
RCW 5.60.060(2)(a) concerning:

(A) Litigation that has
been specifically threatened to which the agency, the governing body, or a
member acting in an official capacity is, or is likely to become, a party;

(B) Litigation that the
agency reasonably believes may be commenced by or against the agency, the
governing body, or a member acting in an official capacity; or

(C) Litigation or legal
risks of a proposed action or current practice that the agency has identified
when public discussion of the litigation or legal risks is likely to result in
an adverse legal or financial consequence to the agency;

(j) ((To consider,
in the case of the state library commission or its advisory bodies, western
library network prices, products, equipment, and services, when such discussion
would be likely to adversely affect the network's ability to conduct business
in a competitive economic climate. However, final action on these matters
shall be taken in a meeting open to the public;

(k))) To consider, in the case of the state
investment board, financial and commercial information when the information
relates to the investment of public trust or retirement funds and when public
knowledge regarding the discussion would result in loss to such funds or in
private loss to the providers of this information.

(2) Before convening in
executive session, the presiding officer of a governing body shall publicly
announce the purpose for excluding the public from the meeting place, and the
time when the executive session will be concluded. The executive session may
be extended to a stated later time by announcement of the presiding officer.

Sec. 224. RCW 43.105.290 and 1996
c 171 s 13 are each amended to read as follows:

The ((state library,
with the assistance of the)) department of information services and the
state archives((,)) shall establish a pilot project to design and test
an electronic information locator system, allowing members of the public to
locate and access electronic public records. In designing the system, the
following factors shall be considered: (1) Ease of operation by citizens; (2)
access through multiple technologies, such as direct dial and toll-free
numbers, kiosks, and the internet; (3) compatibility with private on-line
services; and (4) capability of expanding the electronic public records
included in the system. The pilot project may restrict the type and quality of
electronic public records that are included in the system to test the
feasibility of making electronic public records and information widely
available to the public.

Sec. 225. RCW 43.105.825 and 1999
c 285 s 7 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) In overseeing the
technical aspects of the K-20 network, the information services board is not
intended to duplicate the statutory responsibilities of the higher education
coordinating board, the superintendent of public instruction, the information
services board, ((the state librarian,)) or the governing boards of the
institutions of higher education.

(2) The board may not
interfere in any curriculum or legally offered programming offered over the
network.

(3) The coordination of
telecommunications planning for institutions of higher education as defined in
RCW 28B.10.016 remains the responsibility of the higher education coordinating
board under RCW 28B.80.600. The board may recommend, but not require,
revisions to the higher education coordinating board's telecommunications plan.

(4) The responsibility
to review and approve standards and common specifications for the network
remains the responsibility of the information services board under RCW
43.105.041.

(5) The coordination of
telecommunications planning for the common schools remains the responsibility
of the superintendent of public instruction. Except as set forth in RCW
43.105.041(1)(d), the board may recommend, but not require, revisions to the
superintendent's telecommunications plans.

Sec. 226. RCW 43.126.025 and 1983
c 273 s 2 are each amended to read as follows:

There is hereby created
a Washington state board on geographic names composed of:

(1) ((The state
librarian or a representative;

(2))) The commissioner of public lands or a
representative;

(((3))) (2)
The chairperson of the Washington state heritage council created by 1983 law;
and

(((4))) (3)
Four members from the general public to be appointed by the commissioner of
public lands.

The commissioner of
public lands or his or her representative shall be chairman of the board.

The members of the
initial board to be appointed by the commissioner shall be appointed as
follows: One member for a one-year term, one member for a two-year term, one
member for a three-year term, and one member for a four-year term. Thereafter,
each member shall be appointed for a three-year term. Each member of the board
shall continue in office until a successor is appointed.

Sec. 227. RCW 43.131.051 and 2000
c 189 s 4 are each amended to read as follows:

The joint legislative
audit and review committee shall conduct a program and fiscal review of any
entity scheduled for termination under this chapter. This program and fiscal
review shall be completed and a preliminary report prepared during the calendar
year prior to the date established for termination. These reports shall be
prepared in the manner set forth in RCW 44.28.071 and 44.28.075. Upon
completion of its preliminary report, the joint legislative audit and review
committee shall transmit copies of the report to the office of financial
management and any affected entity. The final report shall include the
response, if any, of the affected entity and the office of financial management
in the same manner as set forth in RCW 44.28.088, except the affected entity
and the office of financial management shall have sixty days to respond to the
report. The joint legislative audit and review committee shall transmit the
final report to the legislature, to the state entity affected, and to
the governor((, and to the state library)).

Sec. 228. RCW 43.136.030 and 1982
1st ex.s. c 35 s 41 are each amended to read as follows:

The ((legislative
budget)) joint legislative audit and review committee shall review
each tax preference for termination by the processes provided in this chapter.
The review shall be completed and a report prepared on or before June 30th of
the year prior to the date established for termination. Upon completion of its
report, the ((legislative budget)) joint legislative audit and review
committee shall transmit copies of the report to the department of revenue.
The department of revenue may then conduct its own review of the tax preference
scheduled for termination and shall prepare a report on or before September
30th of the year prior to the date established for termination. Upon
completion of its report the department of revenue shall transmit copies of its
report to the ((legislative budget)) joint legislative audit and
review committee. The ((legislative budget)) joint legislative
audit and review committee shall prepare a final report that includes the
reports of both the department of revenue and the ((legislative budget))
joint legislative audit and review committee. The ((legislative
budget)) joint legislative audit and review committee and the
department of revenue shall, upon request, make available to each other all
working papers, studies, and other documents which relate to reports required
under this section. The ((legislative budget)) joint legislative
audit and review committee shall transmit the final report to all members
of the legislature((,)) and to the governor((, and to the
state library)).

Sec. 229. RCW 63.29.280 and 1983 c
179 s 28 are each amended to read as follows:

If the department
determines after investigation that any property delivered under this chapter
has insubstantial commercial value, the department may destroy or otherwise
dispose of the property at any time. No action or proceeding may be maintained
against the state or any officer or against the holder for or on account of any
action taken by the department pursuant to this section. Documents which are
to be destroyed shall be copied on film and retained for ten years. Original documents
which the department has identified to be destroyed and which have legal
significance or historical interest may be surrendered to the state historical
museum ((or to the state library)).

Sec. 230. RCW 70.95C.060 and 1988
c 177 s 6 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) The office shall
establish a statewide waste reduction hot line with the capacity to refer waste
generators and the public to sources of information on specific waste reduction
techniques and procedures. The hot line shall coordinate with all other state
waste hot lines.

(2) The director shall
((work with the state library to)) establish a data base system that
shall include proven waste reduction techniques and case studies of effective
waste reduction. The data base system shall be: (a) Coordinated with all
other state agency data bases on waste reduction; (b) administered in
conjunction with the statewide waste reduction hot line; and (c) readily
accessible to the public.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
231. The following acts or
parts of acts are each repealed:

(1) RCW 40.06.030 (Deposits by state
agencies--Exemptions) and 1977 ex.s. c 232 s 10 & 1963 c 233 s 3;

(2) RCW 40.06.040 (Inter-library depository
contracts) and 1981 c 260 s 8;

(3) RCW 40.06.060 (Agencies to furnish lists
to center) and 1963 c 233 s 6;

(4) RCW 40.06.900 (Effective date--1963 c
233) and 1963 c 233 s 8;

(5) RCW 27.04.010 (Library created) and 1999
c 123 s 1 & 1943 c 207 s 1;

(6) RCW 27.04.020 (Library commission) and
1999 c 123 s 2, 1984 c 287 s 58, 1975-'76 2nd ex.s. c 34 s 66, 1967 c 198 s 1,
1963 c 202 s 1, 1961 c 45 s 1, & 1941 c 5 s 1;

(7) RCW 27.04.030 (Duties of commission) and
1999 c 123 s 3, 1987 c 330 s 401, 1986 c 79 s 1, 1984 c 152 s 1, 1943 c 207 s
2, & 1941 c 5 s 2;

(8) RCW 27.04.045 (Duties of state
librarian--Lending fees for interlibrary services) and 1999 c 123 s 5, 1996 c
171 s 6, 1989 c 96 s 7, & 1984 c 152 s 2; and

(9) RCW 27.04.055 (Qualifications of
librarians--Rules--Fees) and 1999 c 123 s 4.

PART
3

MISCELLANEOUS PROVISIONS

NEW SECTION. Sec.
301. (1) To assure that the
state library's document, book, and other printed material collections are
appropriately distributed, a task force is created to oversee the dissemination
of the library's collection.

(2) The task force
shall be comprised of the following members:

(a) The state librarian
or his or her designee;

(b) The dean or
director of library services for the following universities and college:
University of Washington; Washington State University; Eastern Washington
University; Western Washington University; Central Washington University; and
The Evergreen State College;

(c) Two representatives
of community college libraries to be selected by the state board for community
and technical colleges;

(d) Four
representatives of local public libraries, three to be selected by the
association of Washington cities and one to be selected by the Washington state
association of counties;

(e) A representative,
selected by the secretary or director of each state agency that currently
houses a branch of the state library;

(f) The director of
financial management or his or her designee;

(g) The director of the
department of information services or his or her designee;

(h) The director of the
department of general administration or his or her designee;

(i) The director of the
department of community, trade, and economic development or his or her
designee;

(j) The director of the
department of personnel or his or her designee; and

(k) Two representatives
from the office of the secretary of state, one of whom shall be the state
archivist.

(3) The chair of the
task force shall be appointed by the governor.

(4) The state library's
books, documents, or other printed materials may only be distributed to public
local, state agency, or academic libraries.

(5) Any of the state
library's books, documents, or other printed materials not distributed as
provided in this section shall be placed in surplus.

(6) In making the
decisions regarding the distribution of the state library's collection, the
task force shall consider the following principles:

(a) Book, document, or
printed material collections shall be distributed as a group whenever possible;

(b) If possible, books,
documents, and other printed material on particular topics shall be distributed
to state agency libraries whose mission is in keeping with the topics of the
collection; and

(c) In the event
multiple agencies express interest in a particular collection, consideration
shall be given to the agency that has sufficient physical space to house the
collection.

(7) The task force
shall maintain documentation indicating with which agency the state library's
books, documents, and other printed materials have been placed. This
documentation shall be published on the web site for the office of financial
management.

(8) The task force
shall begin its work on April 1, 2002, and complete its work no later than
October 31, 2002.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
302. Part headings used in
this act are not any part of the law.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
303. Section 227 of this act
expires June 30, 2015.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
304. Section 301 of this act
is necessary for the immediate preservation of the public peace, health, or
safety, or support of the state government and its existing public
institutions, and takes effect April 1, 2002.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 305. Sections 1, 101, 201
through 231, 302, and 303 of this act take effect October 1, 2002.

---
END ---