BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF
WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1. RCW 82.02.090 and 1990
1st ex.s. c 17 s 48 are each amended to read as follows:

Unless the context
clearly requires otherwise, the following definitions shall apply in RCW
82.02.050 through 82.02.090:

(1) "Development
activity" means any construction or expansion of a building, structure, or
use, any change in use of a building or structure, or any changes in the use of
land, that creates additional demand and need for public facilities.

(2) "Development
approval" means any written authorization from a county, city, or town
which authorizes the commencement of development activity.

(3) "Impact
fee" means a payment of money imposed upon development as a condition of
development approval to pay for public facilities needed to serve new growth
and development, and that is reasonably related to the new development that
creates additional demand and need for public facilities, that is a
proportionate share of the cost of the public facilities, and that is used for
facilities that reasonably benefit the new development. "Impact fee"
does not include a reasonable permit or application fee.

(4) "Owner"
means the owner of record of real property, although when real property is
being purchased under a real estate contract, the purchaser shall be considered
the owner of the real property if the contract is recorded.

(5) "Proportionate
share" means that portion of the cost of public facility improvements that
are reasonably related to the service demands and needs of new development.

(6) "Project
improvements" mean site improvements and facilities that are planned and
designed to provide service for a particular development project and that are
necessary for the use and convenience of the occupants or users of the project,
and are not system improvements. No improvement or facility included in a
capital facilities plan approved by the governing body of the county, city, or
town shall be considered a project improvement.

(7) "Public
facilities" means the following capital facilities owned or operated by
government entities: (a) Public streets and roads; (b) publicly owned parks,
open space, and recreation facilities; (c) school facilities; ((and))
(d) fire protection facilities in jurisdictions that are not part of a fire
district; and (e) criminal justice facilities. For the purposes of this
subsection, "criminal justice facilities" means personnel and the
construction and expansion of jails, court facilities, juvenile justice
facilities, and police facilities.

(8) "Service
area" means a geographic area defined by a county, city, town, or
intergovernmental agreement in which a defined set of public facilities provide
service to development within the area. Service areas shall be designated on
the basis of sound planning or engineering principles.

(9)
"System improvements" mean public facilities that are included in the
capital facilities plan and are designed to provide service to service areas
within the community at large, in contrast to project improvements.

--- END ---