BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF
WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec.
1. The legislature finds
that excessive growth in state spending and ongoing expenditure obligations
have created a budget crisis of critical proportions which requires immediate
and demanding fiscal discipline. Serious and comprehensive measures must be
taken to reduce the costs of government as quickly as possible and to ensure
that citizens are not burdened with even higher taxes. Reassessing the
function and control of the Washington management service is an essential part
of resolving this budget crisis.

The legislature further
finds that organizations with larger staff per manager ratios are more
efficient, and that state government can become more effective and less costly
by reducing the layers of management, enlarging each manager's span of control,
focusing decision-making authority, and moving decision-making authority down
into units which provide services directly to the citizens. This will allow
faster, more people-oriented decision making, lower management costs, improve
employee satisfaction and motivation, create more opportunities for development
of employee skills, put greater management focus on planning and goals, reduce
duplication of tasks, roles, and responsibilities, ensure less micromanagement,
speed decision making, provide clearer communication between bottom and top
layers, make for less paperwork due to fewer reporting requirements, decrease
the need for management-support staff, and result in fewer planning and
coordination meetings.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
2. A new section is added
to chapter 41.06 RCW to read as follows:

No agency may employ
personnel who are classified as managers with supervisory job titles but who
have no direct subordinates.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
3. A new section is added
to chapter 41.06 RCW to read as follows:

Unless prohibited by
federal law, each agency shall have no more than one manager with a supervisory
job title for each twenty-five nonmanagement employees within the agency.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
4. A new section is added
to chapter 41.06 RCW to read as follows:

Each agency must reduce
the number of employees in the Washington management service by twenty-five
percent no later than December 31, 2002.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
5. A new section is added
to chapter 41.06 RCW to read as follows:

Any reductions in the
number of Washington management service employees within an agency shall not
result in an increase of classified employees within the agency. Any
reductions in the number of Washington management service employees within the
state shall not result in an increase of classified employees within the state.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
6. A new section is added
to chapter 41.06 RCW to read as follows:

Section 2,
3, or 4 of this act shall not apply if the governor certifies to the
legislature that substantive and compelling reasons exist that an agency should
be exempt from complying with the provisions of this act. The governor shall
submit findings and conclusions to support the certification based on empirical
facts that show by clear and convincing evidence that the public will be harmed
if the agency were to comply with the provisions of this act.

---
END ---