BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF
WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec.
1. A new section is added
to chapter 47.36 RCW to read as follows:

(1) When exercising its
authority to erect and maintain motorist information sign panels under RCW
47.36.310 and 47.36.320, the department shall contract with a private
contractor for a term of ten years. The contractor selected by the department
must be incorporated, and must maintain an office, in this state.

(2) The contractor, at
no cost to the department, is solely responsible for marketing, administration,
financial management, sign fabrication, installation, and maintenance and is
subject to the provisions of this chapter otherwise applicable to the
department. The contractor may set the market rate to be charged to businesses
advertising on the motorist informational signs.

(3) A contract entered
into between the department and a contractor must require the contractor to
administer, fabricate, install, and maintain community historical signs
authorized for placement by the department at no cost to the department.

(4) The department may
set such contractual terms as it deems necessary to guarantee the performance
of the contract. The department shall periodically monitor the performance of
the contract.

(5) The
department shall hold a public auction to determine the contractor specified in
this section. The department shall give public notice of the auction at least
thirty days before the auction. The highest bidder must be selected as the
contractor. At the expiration of the ten-year contract, the department shall
again conduct a public auction to determine the contractor for the next ten
years.

--- END ---