BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF
WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1. RCW 47.46.030 and 1996 c
280 s 1 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) The secretary or a
designee shall periodically solicit proposals from, and negotiate and
enter into agreements with, private entities to undertake as appropriate,
together with the department and other public entities, all or a portion of the
study, planning, design, construction, operation, and maintenance of
transportation systems and facilities, using in whole or in part private
sources of financing.

The public-private
initiatives program may develop ((up to six)) demonstration projects.
Each proposal shall be weighed on its own merits, and each of the ((six))
agreements shall be negotiated individually, and as a stand-alone project.

(2) ((If project
proposals selected prior to September 1, 1994, are terminated by the public or
private sectors, the department shall not select any new projects, including
project proposals submitted to the department prior to September 1, 1994, and
designated by the transportation commission as placeholder projects, after June
16, 1995, until June 30, 1997.

The department, in
consultation with the legislative transportation committee, shall conduct a program
and fiscal audit of the public-private initiatives program for the biennium
ending June 30, 1997. The department shall submit a progress report to the
legislative transportation committee on the program and fiscal audit by June
30, 1996, with preliminary and final audit reports due December 1, 1996, and
June 30, 1997, respectively.))

The department shall
develop and submit a proposed public involvement plan to the ((1997)) 2003
legislature to identify the process for selecting new potential projects and
the associated costs of implementing the plan. The ((legislature)) legislative
transportation committee must adopt the public involvement plan before the
department may proceed with any activity related to project identification and
selection. Following legislative adoption of the public involvement plan, the
department is authorized to implement the plan and to identify potential new
projects.

The public involvement
plan for projects selected after June 30, 1997, shall, at a minimum, identify
projects that: (a) Have the potential of achieving overall public support
among users of the projects, residents of communities in the vicinity of the
projects, and residents of communities impacted by the projects; (b) meet a
state transportation need; (c) provide a significant state benefit; and (d)
provide competition among proposers and maximum cost benefits to users.
Prospective projects may include projects identified by the department or
submitted by the private sector.

Projects that meet the
minimum criteria established under this section and the requirements of the
public involvement plan developed by the department and approved by the
legislature shall be submitted to the Washington state transportation
commission for its review. The commission, in turn, shall submit a list of
eligible projects to the legislative transportation committee for its
consideration. Forty-five days after the submission to the legislative
transportation committee of the list of eligible projects, the secretary is
authorized to solicit proposals for the eligible project.

(3) Prior to entering
into agreements with private entities under the requirements of RCW 47.46.040
for any project proposal selected before September 1, 1994, or after June 30,
1997, except as provided for in subsections (((11) and)) (12) and
(13) of this section, the department shall require an advisory vote as
provided under subsections (5) through (10) of this section.

(4) The advisory vote
shall apply to project proposals selected prior to September 1, 1994, or after
June 30, 1997, that receive public opposition as demonstrated by the submission
to the department of original petitions bearing at least five thousand
signatures of individuals opposing the project collected and submitted in
accordance with the dates established in subsections (12) and (13) of this
section. The advisory vote shall be on the preferred alternative identified
under the requirements of chapter 43.21C RCW and, if applicable, the national
environmental policy act, 42 U.S.C. 4321 et seq. The execution by the
department of the advisory vote process established in this section is subject
to the prior appropriation of funds by the legislature for the purpose of
conducting environmental impact studies, a public involvement program, local
involvement committee activities, traffic and economic impact analyses,
engineering and technical studies, and the advisory vote.

(5) In preparing for
the advisory vote, the department shall conduct a comprehensive analysis of
traffic patterns and economic impact to define the geographical boundary of the
project area that is affected by the imposition of tolls or user fees
authorized under this chapter. The area so defined is referred to in this
section as the affected project area. In defining the affected project area,
the department shall, at a minimum, undertake: (a) A comparison of the
estimated percentage of residents of communities in the vicinity of the project
and in other communities impacted by the project who could be subject to tolls or
user fees and the estimated percentage of other users and transient traffic
that could be subject to tolls or user fees; (b) an analysis of the anticipated
traffic diversion patterns; (c) an analysis of the potential economic impact
resulting from proposed toll rates or user fee rates imposed on residents,
commercial traffic, and commercial entities in communities in the vicinity of
and impacted by the project; (d) an analysis of the economic impact of tolls or
user fees on the price of goods and services generally; and (e) an analysis of
the relationship of the project to state transportation needs and benefits.

(6)(a) After
determining the definition of the affected project area, the department shall
establish a committee comprised of individuals who represent cities and
counties in the affected project area; organizations formed to support or
oppose the project; and users of the project. The committee shall be named the
public-private local involvement committee, and be known as the local
involvement committee.

(b) The members of the
local involvement committee shall be: (i) An elected official from each city
within the affected project area; (ii) an elected official from each county
within the affected project area; (iii) two persons from each county within the
affected project area who represent an organization formed in support of the
project, if the organization exists; (iv) two persons from each county within
the affected project area who represent an organization formed to oppose the
project, if the organization exists; and (v) four public members active in a
statewide transportation organization. If the committee makeup results in an
even number of committee members, there shall be an additional appointment of
an elected official from the county in which all, or the greatest portion of
the project is located.

(c) City and county
elected officials shall be appointed by a majority of the members of the city
or county legislative authorities of each city or county within the affected
project area, respectively. The county legislative authority of each county
within the affected project area shall identify and validate organizations
officially formed in support of or in opposition to the project and shall make
the appointments required under this section from a list submitted by the chair
of the organizations. Public members shall be appointed by the governor. All
appointments to the local involvement committee shall be made and submitted to
the department of transportation no later than January 1, 1996, for projects
selected prior to September 1, 1994, and no later than thirty days after the
affected project area is defined for projects selected after June 30, 1997.
Vacancies in the membership of the local involvement committee shall be filled by
the appointing authority under (b)(i) through (v) of this subsection for each
position on the committee.

(d) The local
involvement committee shall serve in an advisory capacity to the department on
all matters related to the execution of the advisory vote.

(e) Members of the
local involvement committee serve without compensation and may not receive
subsistence, lodging expenses, or travel expenses.

(7) The department
shall conduct a minimum thirty-day public comment period on the definition of
the geographical boundary of the project area. The department, in consultation
with the local involvement committee, shall make adjustments, if required, to
the definition of the geographical boundary of the affected project area, based
on comments received from the public. Within fourteen calendar days after the
public comment period, the department shall set the boundaries of the affected
project area in units no smaller than a precinct as defined in RCW 29.01.120.

(8) The department, in
consultation with the local involvement committee, shall develop a description
for selected project proposals. After developing the description of the
project proposal, the department shall publish the project proposal description
in newspapers of general circulation for seven calendar days in the affected
project area. Within fourteen calendar days after the last day of the
publication of the project proposal description, the department shall transmit
a copy of the map depicting the affected project area and the description of
the project proposal to the county auditor of the county in which any portion
of the affected project area is located.

(9) The department
shall provide the legislative transportation committee with progress reports on
the status of the definition of the affected project area and the description
of the project proposal.

(10) Upon receipt of
the map and the description of the project proposal, the county auditor shall,
within thirty days, verify the precincts that are located within the affected
project area. The county auditor shall prepare the text identifying and
describing the affected project area and the project proposal using the
definition of the geographical boundary of the affected project area and the
project description submitted by the department and shall set an election date
for the submission of a ballot proposition authorizing the imposition of tolls
or user fees to implement the proposed project within the affected project
area, which date may be the next succeeding general election to be held in the
state, or at a special election, if requested by the department. The text of
the project proposal must appear in a voter's pamphlet for the affected project
area. The department shall pay the costs of publication and distribution. The
special election date must be the next date for a special election provided
under RCW 29.13.020 that is at least sixty days but, if authorized under RCW
29.13.020, no more than ninety days after the receipt of the final map and
project description by the auditor. The department shall pay the cost of an
election held under this section.

(11) Notwithstanding
any other provision of law, the department may contract with a private
developer of a selected project proposal to conduct environmental impact
studies, a public involvement program, and engineering and technical studies
funded by the legislature. For projects subject to this subsection, the
department shall not enter into an agreement under RCW 47.46.040 prior to the
advisory vote on the preferred alternative.

(12) Subsections (5)
through (10) of this section shall not apply to project proposals selected
prior to September 1, 1994, that have no organized public opposition as
demonstrated by the submission to the department of original petitions bearing
at least five thousand signatures of individuals opposing the project,
collected and submitted after September 1, 1994, and by thirty calendar days
after June 16, 1995.

(13) Subsections (5)
through (10) of this section shall not apply to project proposals selected
after June 30, 1997, that have no organized public opposition as demonstrated
by the submission to the department of original petitions bearing at least five
thousand signatures of individuals opposing the project, collected and
submitted by ninety calendar days after project selection.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 2. The department of
transportation shall provide staff support to a legislative oversight committee
that will manage a study of public-private partnerships in transportation. The
legislative oversight committee will consist of three members from each caucus
in each house of the legislature, appointed by the leadership of the
legislators' respective caucus. The legislative oversight committee shall
analyze and make recommendations on: (1) The barriers that prevent the private
sector from providing transportation services, which could include ferry, bus,
or monorail; (2) the use of public-private partnerships nationally and the
experiences of other states in using public-private partnerships; (3) the
public-private opportunities for transportation projects in Washington; and (4)
the advantages and disadvantages of the financing options available for
public-private partnerships. The legislative oversight committee shall report
its findings and recommendations to the legislature by December 1, 2003.

---
END ---