BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF
WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec.
1. The legislature finds
that watershed planning and protection can enhance the selection of wetland,
storm water, and riparian mitigation sites. The legislature also finds that
locating mitigation sites adjacent to or in close proximity to impacted sites
may not be the most beneficial use of those sites within a watershed, and that
locating mitigation sites to better locations within a watershed can both
enhance the benefits of department mitigation and reduce the cost of that
mitigation.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
2. When developing wetlands,
storm water, and riparian mitigation sites for ecological restoration and
enhancement as compensation for impacts within a water resource inventory area,
the department may locate those wetlands at any location within the same water
resource inventory area. In evaluating mitigation sites, the department shall
consider the hydrology of the watershed, the location of other environmental
projects and activities by regional fishery enhancement groups or other
watershed groups, and the costs and benefits of those sites.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
3. The department shall
develop a unified one-stop permit process for transportation projects to comply
with environmental standards and best management practices set forth in
federal, state, and local laws and regulations. The department shall make this
process available to local governments that may wish to adopt it.

The department shall
contact appropriate agencies to form an interdisciplinary team for projects not
covered by programmatic permits. These teams must include the department,
permitting/resource agencies, and private or public sector discipline experts.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
4. The department shall seek
comment and audits from agencies that issue permits to department projects.
The department shall work with these agencies to insure access to those
agencies for periodic auditing of the department process, performing project
visits for compliance, and review of monitoring data. The department shall
compile data from this process to measure its performance in terms of permit
compliance, environmental benefit, project delivery, and cost savings.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
5. The permit process may be
expanded or contracted to fit the unique issues for a project and may include
federal, state, and local jurisdictions, and any number of media such as air,
watershed, water quality, water resource, hydraulic permit approval, noise,
wetlands, streambank protection, shorelines, hazardous materials, erosion
control, or other environmental elements that may require approval by
regulatory bodies. This process is intended as an extension of the National Environmental
Policy Act and the State Environmental Policy Act documentation process, and is
not intended to supplant early involvement by resource and regulatory agencies,
but rather is intended to streamline the permitting process.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 6. Sections 1 through 5 of
this act are added to chapter 47.06C RCW.

---
END ---